{'en': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Affect in Tweets', 'fr': 'SemeVal-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Affect dans les Tweets', 'ar': 'SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: التأثير في التغريدات', 'es': 'Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Efecto en los tuits', 'pt': 'SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Afete nos Tweets', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク1 ：ツイートに影響を与える', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018 ňŐí1:ŠÄĘŠľçńŞş', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1: Tweets में प्रभावित', 'ru': 'SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Влияние на твиты', 'ga': 'SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Tionchar i dTvuíteanna', 'ka': 'SemEval-2018 დავალება 1: შექმნა Tweets-ში', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Επίδραση στα tweets', 'hu': 'SemEval-2018 feladat 1: hatás a tweetekben', 'lt': '2018 m. pusmetis vertinimas 1 užduotis: Poveikis Tweetuose', 'it': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affetto nei Tweet', 'mk': 'SemEval-2018 задача 1: Влијание на твитови', 'kk': 'Бөлшегі- 2018 1- тапсырма: Твиттерде әсер етеді', 'ml': 'സെമ്', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets-д нөлөөлдөг', 'no': 'HalvEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Etter i tweeter', 'ms': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Terkesan dalam Tweets', 'pl': 'SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Efekt w Tweetach', 'sr': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Afekt na Tweets', 'si': 'සම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 1: ට්විට් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'ro': 'SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Afect în Tweets', 'sv': 'SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Påverkan i tweets', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 1: Tweets- ல் விளைவு', 'so': 'SemEval-2018 Shaqo 1: Affect in Tweets', 'mt': 'SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Affett fit-Tweets', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets میں اثر', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 1: Effect in Twitter', 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ hoàn hảo 1: Đóng góp trong Tweet', 'nl': 'SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Effect in Tweets', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Въздействие в туитовете', 'da': 'SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Påvirkning i tweets', 'hr': 'SemEval-2018 zadatak 1: utjecaj na Tweets', 'fa': 'عملۀ نیم Eval-2018 ۱: اثر در Tweets', 'de': 'SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Auswirkungen in Tweets', 'id': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Terkena di Tweets', 'tr': 'Görev 1', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 1: 트윗에 영향', 'sw': 'SemEval-2018 Kazi 1: Inaathiri kwenye twita', 'sq': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets', 'am': 'ስምንት', 'hy': 'ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի առաջին հանձնարարությունը. Անշանակություն Tweetներում', 'af': 'SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Afteken in Tweets', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets i칞ind톛 m칲xt톛lif', 'ca': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets', 'et': 'SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: mõju tweets', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ১: টুইটে প্রভাবিত', 'bs': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Afekt na Tweets', 'cs': 'SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Efekt ve tweetech', 'fi': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets', 'jv': 'Sample rate', 'he': 'SemEval-2018 משימה 1: השפעה בטוויטים', 'ha': 'QWebPage', 'sk': 'SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Vpliv v tweets', 'bo': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: impact in Tweets'}
{'en': 'We present the SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Affect in Tweets, which includes an array of subtasks on inferring the affectual state of a person from their tweet. For each task, we created labeled data from English, Arabic, and Spanish tweets. The individual tasks are : 1. emotion intensity regression, 2. emotion intensity ordinal classification, 3. valence (sentiment) regression, 4. valence ordinal classification, and 5. emotion classification. Seventy-five teams (about 200 team members) participated in the shared task. We summarize the methods, resources, and tools used by the participating teams, with a focus on the techniques and resources that are particularly useful. We also analyze systems for consistent bias towards a particular race or gender. The data is made freely available to further improve our understanding of how people convey emotions through language.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos a Tarefa 1 do SemEval-2018: Afeto em Tweets, que inclui uma série de subtarefas para inferir o estado afetivo de uma pessoa a partir de seu tweet. Para cada tarefa, criamos dados rotulados de tweets em inglês, árabe e espanhol. As tarefas individuais são: 1. regressão da intensidade da emoção, 2. classificação ordinal da intensidade da emoção, 3. regressão da valência (sentimento), 4. classificação ordinal da valência e 5. classificação da emoção. Setenta e cinco equipes (cerca de 200 membros da equipe) participaram da tarefa compartilhada. Resumimos os métodos, recursos e ferramentas utilizados pelas equipes participantes, com foco nas técnicas e recursos que são particularmente úteis. Também analisamos sistemas para tendências consistentes em relação a uma determinada raça ou gênero. Os dados são disponibilizados gratuitamente para melhorar ainda mais nossa compreensão de como as pessoas transmitem emoções por meio da linguagem.', 'ar': 'نقدم مهمة SemEval-2018 1: التأثير في التغريدات ، والتي تتضمن مجموعة من المهام الفرعية حول استنتاج الحالة المؤثرة لشخص ما من تغريدته. لكل مهمة ، أنشأنا بيانات مصنفة من التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية والعربية والإسبانية. المهام الفردية هي: 1. انحدار شدة العاطفة ، 2. تصنيف ترتيبي لشدة العاطفة ، 3. انحدار التكافؤ (العاطفة) ، 4. تصنيف ترتيبي التكافؤ ، 5. تصنيف العاطفة. شارك خمسة وسبعون فريقًا (حوالي 200 عضو في الفريق) في المهمة المشتركة. نلخص الأساليب والموارد والأدوات التي تستخدمها الفرق المشاركة ، مع التركيز على التقنيات والموارد المفيدة بشكل خاص. نقوم أيضًا بتحليل أنظمة التحيز المستمر تجاه عرق أو جنس معين. يتم توفير البيانات مجانًا لزيادة تحسين فهمنا لكيفية نقل الأشخاص للعواطف من خلال اللغة.', 'es': 'Presentamos la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Efecto en los Tweets, que incluye una serie de subtareas para inferir el estado afectivo de una persona a partir de su tuit. Para cada tarea, creamos datos etiquetados de tuits en inglés, árabe y español. Las tareas individuales son: 1. regresión de la intensidad de la emoción, 2. clasificación ordinal de la intensidad de la emoción, 3. regresión de la valencia (sentimiento), 4. clasificación ordinal de valencia y 5. clasificación de las emociones. Setenta y cinco equipos (unos 200 miembros del equipo) participaron en la tarea compartida. Resumimos los métodos, recursos y herramientas utilizados por los equipos participantes, centrándonos en las técnicas y los recursos que son particularmente útiles. También analizamos los sistemas para detectar un sesgo constante hacia una raza o género en particular. Los datos están disponibles gratuitamente para mejorar aún más nuestra comprensión de cómo las personas transmiten emociones a través del lenguaje.', 'fr': "Nous présentons la Tâche 1 de SemeVal-2018\xa0: Affect in Tweets, qui comprend un ensemble de sous-tâches permettant de déduire l'état affectif d'une personne à partir de son tweet. Pour chaque tâche, nous avons créé des données étiquetées à partir de tweets en anglais, en arabe et en espagnol. Les tâches individuelles sont les suivantes\xa0: 1. régression de l'intensité des émotions, 2. classification ordinale de l'intensité des émotions, 3. régression de valence (sentiment), 4. classification ordinale de valence et 5. classification des émotions. Soixante-quinze équipes (environ 200 membres) ont participé à la tâche partagée. Nous résumons les méthodes, les ressources et les outils utilisés par les équipes participantes, en mettant l'accent sur les techniques et les ressources qui sont particulièrement utiles. Nous analysons également les systèmes pour détecter les biais constants en faveur d'une race ou d'un sexe en particulier Les données sont mises à disposition gratuitement afin d'améliorer notre compréhension de la façon dont les gens transmettent leurs émotions par le biais du langage.", 'ja': '私たちは、SemEval -2018タスク1 ：ツイートに影響を与える。これには、ツイートから人の影響状態を推測するためのサブタスクの配列が含まれている。タスクごとに、英語、アラビア語、スペイン語のツイートからラベル付けされたデータを作成しました。個々のタスクは、1.感情の強さの回帰、2.感情の強さの順序分類、3.価（感情）の回帰、4.価の順序分類、および5.感情の分類である。共有タスクには75チーム（チームメンバー約200名）が参加した。参加チームが使用する方法、リソース、ツールをまとめ、特に役立つテクニックとリソースに焦点を当てます。また、特定の人種または性別に対する一貫した偏見についてもシステムを分析します。このデータは、人々が言語を介して感情をどのように伝えるかについての理解をさらに深めるために、自由に利用できるようになっています。', 'zh': '余言SemEval-2018务1:推文之中,一系于推文,一人之情。 凡诸职事,皆于英语、阿拉伯语、西班牙语推文创立标数。 一任:1.情强归,2.情强序数类,3.效价(情)归,4。 价序数类,和 5. 情分。 75团队(约200名团队员)与共其事。 总参赛团队用之法,资用之具,重者,特有用之术也。 又论系统对特定种性偏见。 此数者,免费供也,以进一步提高吾所以通情于人也。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем Задачу 1 SemEval-2018: Влияние в твитах, которая включает в себя множество подзадач по выводу аффективного состояния человека из его твита. Для каждого задания мы создавали маркированные данные из твитов на английском, арабском и испанском языках. Индивидуальными задачами являются: 1. регрессия интенсивности эмоций, 2. ординарная классификация интенсивности эмоций, 3. регрессия валентности (настроения), 4. ординарная классификация валентности и 5. классификация эмоций. В совместной задаче приняли участие 75 команд (около 200 членов команды). Мы обобщаем методы, ресурсы и инструменты, используемые участвующими группами, уделяя особое внимание методам и ресурсам, которые являются особенно полезными. Мы также анализируем системы на предмет постоянной предвзятости по отношению к определенной расе или полу. Данные предоставляются в свободном доступе для дальнейшего улучшения нашего понимания того, как люди передают эмоции через язык.', 'hi': 'हम SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 प्रस्तुत करते हैं: Tweets में प्रभाव, जिसमें उनके ट्वीट से किसी व्यक्ति की प्रभावशाली स्थिति का अनुमान लगाने पर उप-कार्यों की एक सरणी शामिल है। प्रत्येक कार्य के लिए, हमने अंग्रेजी, अरबी और स्पेनिश ट्वीट्स से लेबल डेटा बनाया। अलग-अलग कार्य हैं: 1. भावना तीव्रता प्रतिगमन, 2. भावना तीव्रता क्रमसूचक वर्गीकरण, 3. वैलेंस (भावना) प्रतिगमन, 4. वैलेंस ऑर्डिनल वर्गीकरण, और 5। भावना वर्गीकरण। 75 टीमों (लगभग 200 टीम के सदस्यों) ने साझा कार्य में भाग लिया। हम भाग लेने वाली टीमों द्वारा उपयोग किए जाने वाले तरीकों, संसाधनों और उपकरणों को संक्षेप में प्रस्तुत करते हैं, विशेष रूप से उपयोगी तकनीकों और संसाधनों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के साथ। हम किसी विशेष जाति या लिंग के प्रति लगातार पूर्वाग्रह के लिए प्रणालियों का भी विश्लेषण करते हैं। डेटा को स्वतंत्र रूप से उपलब्ध कराया जाता है ताकि हमारी समझ में और सुधार हो सके कि लोग भाषा के माध्यम से भावनाओं को कैसे व्यक्त करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair Tasc 1 SemEval-2018: Affect in Tweets, a chuimsíonn raon fothascanna maidir le staid difear duine a bhaint as a thweet. I gcás gach tasc, chruthaíomar sonraí lipéadaithe ó thíteanna Béarla, Araibis agus Spáinnise. Is iad seo a leanas na tascanna aonair: 1. aischéimniú déine na mothúchán, 2. aicmiú ordúil déine na mothúchán, 3. cúlchéimniú valence (meonúchán), 4. aicmiú ordnal valence, agus 5. aicmiú mothúcháin. Ghlac seachtó cúig fhoireann (thart ar 200 ball foirne) páirt sa tasc roinnte. Déanaimid achoimre ar na modhanna, na hacmhainní, agus na huirlisí a úsáideann na foirne rannpháirteacha, agus dírímid ar na teicníochtaí agus na hacmhainní atá thar a bheith úsáideach. Déanaimid anailís freisin ar chórais le haghaidh claonadh comhsheasmhach i dtreo cine nó inscne ar leith. Cuirtear na sonraí ar fáil go héasca chun ár dtuiscint ar conas a chuireann daoine mothúcháin in iúl trí theanga a fheabhsú tuilleadh.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε το έργο 1: Επίδραση στα tweets, το οποίο περιλαμβάνει μια σειρά από δευτερεύουσες εργασίες σχετικά με την εξαγωγή της προσβλητικής κατάστασης ενός ατόμου από το tweet του. Για κάθε εργασία, δημιουργήσαμε δεδομένα με ετικέτα από αγγλικά, αραβικά και ισπανικά tweets. Τα επιμέρους καθήκοντα είναι: 1. παλινδρόμηση έντασης συναισθημάτων, 2. Τακτική ταξινόμηση έντασης συναισθημάτων, 3. παλινδρόμηση valence (sentiment), 4. valence ordinal classification, και 5. ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων. Εβδομήντα πέντε ομάδες (περίπου 200 μέλη ομάδας) συμμετείχαν στην κοινή εργασία. Συνοψίζουμε τις μεθόδους, τους πόρους και τα εργαλεία που χρησιμοποιούν οι συμμετέχουσες ομάδες, με έμφαση στις τεχνικές και τους πόρους που είναι ιδιαίτερα χρήσιμοι. Επίσης αναλύουμε συστήματα για συνεπή προκατάληψη προς μια συγκεκριμένη φυλή ή φύλο. Τα δεδομένα είναι ελεύθερα διαθέσιμα για να βελτιώσουμε περαιτέρω την κατανόηση του τρόπου με τον οποίο οι άνθρωποι μεταφέρουν συναισθήματα μέσω της γλώσσας.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a SemEval-2018 1. feladatot: hatás tweetekben, amely tartalmaz egy személy hatásos állapotának következtetésére vonatkozó részfeladatokat tweetjükből. Minden feladathoz angol, arab és spanyol tweetekből címkézett adatokat hoztunk létre. Az egyes feladatok a következők: 1. érzelmi intenzitás regresszió, 2. érzelmi intenzitás rendes osztályozás, 3. valencia (érzelem) regresszió, 4. és 5. érzelmi osztályozás. Hetvenöt csapat (mintegy 200 csapattag) vett részt a megosztott feladatban. Összefoglaljuk a résztvevő csapatok által használt módszereket, erőforrásokat és eszközöket, fókuszálva a különösen hasznos technikákra és erőforrásokra. Elemezzük a rendszereket egy adott faj vagy nem iránti következetes elfogultság érdekében. Az adatokat szabadon hozzáférhetővé teszik annak érdekében, hogy jobban megértsük, hogy az emberek hogyan közvetítik az érzelmeket a nyelven keresztül.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ SemEval-2018 დავამხსენებთ 1-ი დავალება: შექმნილი Tweets-ში, რომელიც შეიყვანეთ სტატატის ნაწილის ნაწილის შესახებ, რომელიც ერთი ადამიანის შესახებ შესახებ თავის tweet-ის შე ყოველ დავალებისთვის ჩვენ ინგლისური, აპაბიური და სპანელი ტივიტებისთვის ჩვენ შექმნა მართლა. Individual დავალებები არის: 1. ემოციონის ინტენსტიური რეგრესია, 2. ემოციონის ინტენსტივის ორგანალური კლასიფიკაცია, 3. გალენცია (სენტიმენტი) რეგრესია, 4. გალენსი ორგანილური კლასიფიკაცია და 5. ემოციონის კლასიფიკაცია. 75 ჯგუფი (200 ჯგუფი ჯგუფი) სხვადასხვა სამუშაო დაწყვეტა. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ მეტისები, რესურსები და ხელსაწყობილობები, რომლებიც სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა ტექნო ჩვენ ასევე ვიანალიზებთ განსაკუთრებული პრაცია ან გენექციის განსაკუთრებულ წარმოდგენების სისტემი. მონაცემები თავისუფალურად მოხილდება, რომ უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო გავიგებთ ადამიანები როგორ ემოციები ენაზე გადატანა', 'lt': 'We present the SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets, which includes an array of subtasks on inferring the affectual state of a person from their tweet.  Kiekvienam uždaviniui sukūrėme pažymėtus duomenis iš anglų, arabų ir ispanų tweetų. The individual tasks are: 1.  emocijos intensyvumo regresija, 2. emocijos intensyvumo ordininė klasifikacija, 3. valencijos (jautrumo) regresija, 4. valencijos ordininė klasifikacija ir 5. emocijų klasifikacija. Bendroje užduotyje dalyvavo septyniasdešimt penkios komandos (apie 200 komandos narių). Apibendriname dalyvaujančių grupių naudojamus metodus, išteklius ir priemones, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant ypač naudingiems metodams ir ištekliams. Taip pat analizuojame sistemas, kuriomis siekiama nuoseklios pusiausvyros tam tikros rasės ar lyties atžvilgiu. Duomenys yra laisvai prieinami siekiant toliau geriau suprasti, kaip žmonės perduoda emocijas per kalbą.', 'it': "Vi presentiamo il Task 1: Affect in Tweets di SemEval-2018, che include una serie di sottoattività su come dedurre lo stato affettivo di una persona dal suo tweet. Per ogni attività, abbiamo creato dati etichettati da tweet inglese, arabo e spagnolo. I singoli compiti sono: 1. regressione dell'intensità emotiva, 2. Classificazione ordinale dell'intensità emotiva, 3. regressione di valenza (sentiment), 4. classificazione ordinale di valenza, e 5. classificazione emotiva. Settantacinque squadre (circa 200 membri del team) hanno partecipato al compito condiviso. Riassumiamo i metodi, le risorse e gli strumenti utilizzati dai team partecipanti, con particolare attenzione alle tecniche e alle risorse che sono particolarmente utili. Analizziamo anche i sistemi per un pregiudizio coerente verso una particolare razza o genere. I dati sono resi liberamente disponibili per migliorare ulteriormente la nostra comprensione di come le persone trasmettono emozioni attraverso il linguaggio.", 'kk': 'Біз 1- жартық 2018 тапсырманы таңдаймыз: Твиттерде әсер етілген, бұл тапсырмалардың жартық күйін таңдауға арналған жұмыс жолы. Әрбір тапсырма үшін ағылшын, араб және испан tweets тізімінен жарлық деректерді жасадық. Жеке тапсырмалар: 1. емоциялық қанықтығы регрессия, 2. Эмоциялық қанықтығы ординалық классификациясы, 3. Валентанс (сенсимент) регрессия, 4. Валентанс орталық классификациясы және 5. емоциялық классификациясы. Ортақ тапсырманың 75 тобы (барлық 200 топ мүшелері) қатысуға қатынады. Қатысушылар тобында қолданылатын әдістерді, ресурстарды және құралдарды жинақтаймыз. Өте пайдалы техникаларды және ресурстарды көздеген. Біз сондай-ақ бұл жүйелерді өзгертілген рас не гендерге тәуелсіздік тәуелсіздіктерді анализ. Мәліметтер, адамдар тілі арқылы емоцияларды қалай аударып жатқанын түсінуге арналған.', 'mk': 'Ние ја претставуваме SemEval-2018 задачата 1: Влијание на Твитовите, која вклучува голем број потпрашања за инференција на влијателната состојба на личност од нивниот Твитер. За секоја задача, создадовме означени податоци од англиски, арапски и шпански твитови. Индивидуалните задачи се: 1. регресија на емоционалната интензитет, 2. Емоционален интензитет ординална класификација, 3. регресија на валенција (чувство), 4. и 5. емоционална класификација. Седумдесет и пет тимови (околу 200 членови на тимот) учествуваа во заедничката задача. Ги сумираме методите, ресурсите и алатките кои ги користат учествувачките тимови, со фокус на техниките и ресурсите кои се особено корисни. Ние, исто така, ги анализираме системите за константна пристрасност кон одредена раса или пол. Податоците се поставуваат слободно достапни за понатамошно подобрување на нашето разбирање како луѓето ги пренесуваат емоциите преку јазик.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets, yang termasuk sejumlah sub-tanya tentang menyimpulkan keadaan pengaruh seseorang dari tweet mereka. Untuk setiap tugas, kami mencipta data yang ditabel dari tweet Bahasa Inggeris, Arab dan Sepanyol. The individual tasks are: 1.  regresi intensiti emosi, 2. kelasukan ordinal intensiti emosi, 3. regresi valensi (perasaan), 4. kelasukan ordinal valensi, dan 5. klasifikasi emosi. Seventy-five teams (about 200 team members) participated in the shared task.  Kami singkatkan kaedah, sumber, dan alat yang digunakan oleh pasukan yang berpartisipasi, dengan fokus pada teknik dan sumber yang sangat berguna. Kami juga menganalisis sistem untuk bias konsisten terhadap ras atau jenis tertentu. Data tersedia secara bebas untuk meningkatkan pemahaman kita tentang bagaimana orang menyebarkan emosi melalui bahasa.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടെസ്ക് 1: ടൂട്ടികളില്\u200d പ്രഭാവം ഉണ്ട്. അവയില്\u200d ഒരാളുടെ പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്ന അവസ്ഥയെ ബാധിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഒരു വ്യക എല്ലാ ജോലിക്കും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്, അറബി, സ്പാനിഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ലേബല്\u200d ഡേറ്റായി ഉണ്ടാക്കി. വ്യക്തിപരമായ ജോലി: 1. വികാരത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വം 2. വികാരത്തിന്റെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d സാധാരണ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d 3. വാലെന്\u200dസ് (sentiment) രീക്രഷന്\u200d, 4. valence ordinal classification, and 5.  വികാരത്തിന്റെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d. എഴുപത്തഞ്ചു ടീം പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. പങ്കെടുക്കുന്ന ടീമുകളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d, വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d, ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ചുരുക്കിക്കൊടുക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്  പ്രത്യേക വ്യത്യാസം അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സംഘത്തിനു വേണ്ടി നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന പ്രത്യേക വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി ലഭിക്കുന്നു. ആളുകള്\u200d ഭാഷയിലൂടെ എങ്ങനെ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw is-SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affett in Tweets, li jinkludi firxa ta’ sottomistoqsijiet dwar l-inferiment tal-istat affettwali ta’ persuna mit-tweet tagħhom. Għal kull kompitu, ħolqu dejta ttikkettata minn tweets bl-Ingliż, bl-Għarab u bl-Ispanjol. Il-kompiti individwali huma: 1. rigressjoni ta ’ l- intensità ta ’ l- emozzjoni, 2. emotion intensity ordinal classification, 3.  rigressjoni tal-valenza (sentiment), 4. klassifikazzjoni ordinali tal-valenza, u 5. emotion classification.  Ħames u sebgħin tim (madwar 200 membru tat-tim) ipparteċipaw fil-kompitu kondiviż. Aħna niġbru fil-qosor il-metodi, ir-riżorsi u l-għodod użati mit-timijiet parteċipanti, b’enfasi fuq it-tekniki u r-riżorsi li huma partikolarment utli. Aħna analizzaw ukoll sistemi għal preġudizzju konsistenti lejn razza jew sess partikolari. Id-dejta hija disponibbli b’mod liberu biex ittejjeb aktar il-fehim tagħna dwar kif in-nies jgħaddu l-emozzjonijiet permezz tal-lingwa.', 'mn': 'Бид SemEval-2018 Task 1-г тайлбарлаж байна: Твитт дээр нөлөөлдөг нөлөөлдөг хүний нөлөөлдөг нөлөөлдөг нөлөөлдөг байдлыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид ажил бүрт Англи, Араб, Испанийн tweets-ээс тэмдэглэгдсэн мэдээллийг бүтээсэн. Хувь даалгавар нь 1. сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчирхэг сэтгэл хөдлөл, 2. сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчирхийллийн загварын хуваалтыг 3. хариулт (мэдрэмж) regression, 4. мөн 5. сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваарилалт. 75 баг (ойролцоогоор 200 багийн гишүүн) хуваалцах ажилд оролцсон. Бид оролцогчдын баг ашигладаг арга, нөөц болон хэрэгслүүдийг тодорхойлж, ялангуяа хэрэгтэй технологиуд, нөөц бүтээмжүүд дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Мөн бид тодорхой ур чадал эсвэл гендер хүмүүст зөвхөн ур чадалтай байдлын системийг шинжилгээ хийдэг. Хүмүүс хэлээр сэтгэл хөдлөлийг хэрхэн хөдөлгөж байгааг илүү сайжруулахын тулд мэдээллийг чөлөөтэй ашиглаж чадна.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets, który zawiera szereg podzadań dotyczących wnioskowania stanu afektywnego osoby z jej tweeta. Dla każdego zadania tworzyliśmy etykietowane dane z angielskich, arabskich i hiszpańskich tweetów. Poszczególne zadania to: 1. Regresja intensywności emocji, 2. Klasyfikacja regularna intensywności emocji, 3. regresja walencji (sentymentu), 4. klasyfikacja walencyjna i 5. klasyfikacja emocji. W wspólnym zadaniu uczestniczyło siedemdziesiąt pięć zespołów (około 200 członków zespołu). Podsumowujemy metody, zasoby i narzędzia wykorzystywane przez uczestniczące zespoły, ze szczególnym uwzględnieniem technik i zasobów, które są szczególnie przydatne. Analizujemy również systemy pod kątem konsekwentnego uprzedzenia wobec konkretnej rasy lub płci. Dane są udostępniane swobodnie w celu dalszego lepszego zrozumienia tego, jak ludzie przekazują emocje poprzez język.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer oppgåva 1 for semiEval-2018: Effekt i Tweets, som inkluderer ei rekkjefølgje av subtaskar på å få opp påvirkelige tilstand til ein person frå tweet sin. For kvar oppgåve laga vi merkelige data frå engelsk, arabisk og spansk tweets. Den individuelle oppgåva er: 1. Regresjon av emosjonsintensitet, 2. organelle klassifikasjon for emosjonsintensitet, 3. Valans (sentiment) regresjon, 4. Klassifikasjon for valens ordinal og 5. emosjonsklassifikasjon. 75 grupper (omtrent 200 gruppemedlemmer) delta i delt oppgåve. Vi samanserer metodane, ressursane og verktøya som er brukt av dei deltakarane gruppa, med fokus på teknikken og ressursane som er spesielt nyttige. Vi analyserer også systemet for konsistent forsikt mot ein spesielt rase eller seks. Dataet er fritt tilgjengeleg for å forbedra forståelse vårt om korleis folk gjer følelser gjennom språk.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm Sarcina SemEval-2018 1: Afect în Tweets, care include o serie de subactivități privind deducerea stării afectuale a unei persoane din tweet-ul lor. Pentru fiecare sarcină, am creat date etichetate din tweet-uri în engleză, arabă și spaniolă. Sarcinile individuale sunt: 1. regresie de intensitate emoţională, 2. Clasificarea ordinală a intensităţii emoţiilor, 3. regresia valenţei (sentimentului), 4. clasificarea ordinală a valenței și 5. clasificarea emoţiilor. Șaptezeci și cinci de echipe (aproximativ 200 de membri ai echipei) au participat la sarcina partajată. Rezumăm metodele, resursele și instrumentele utilizate de echipele participante, cu accent pe tehnicile și resursele care sunt deosebit de utile. De asemenea, analizăm sistemele pentru părtinirea consecventă față de o anumită rasă sau gen. Datele sunt puse la dispoziție liber pentru a ne îmbunătăți în continuare înțelegerea modului în care oamenii transmit emoții prin limbaj.', 'si': 'අපි සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩක් 1: ට්වීට් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒකෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ ට්වීට් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. හැම වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි, අරාබි සහ ස්පැනිස් ට්විට් වලින් ලේබල් තියෙන්නේ. ප්\u200dරතිකෘති වැඩක් තමයි: 1. භාවිතාවක් උත්සාහ කරනවා, 2. භාවිතාවන්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය විශේෂය, 3. වැලැන්ස් (සැකසුම්) ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, 4. සහ 5. භාවිතාව විශේෂය. කණ්ඩායම් පහය (කණ්ඩායම් එක්කෝ 200 ගැන) සමාගත වැඩේ සමාගත්තා. අපි පද්ධතිය, පද්ධතිය, සහ උපකරණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කණ්ඩායම් වල පාවිච්චි කරනවා, විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ උපක අපි පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා විශේෂ ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් නැත්තම් විශේෂ කරනවා. මේ දත්ත නිදහස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ අපිට භාෂාවන් කොහොමද මිනිස්සු භාෂාවන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය ක', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo zadatak 1. SemEval-2018: utjecaj na Tweets, koji uključuje gomilu podataka o infekciji utjecaja osobe iz njihovog tweet a. Za svaki zadatak smo stvorili označene podatke iz engleskih, arapskih i španjolskih tweeta. Individualni zadatak je 1. regresija emocionalne intenzitete, 2. Organalna klasifikacija emocionalne intenzitete, 3. valencija (osjećaj) regresija, 4. klasifikacija odgovarajućih organa i 5. klasifikacija emocija. Sedamdeset pet tima (oko 200 članova tima) sudjelovali su u zajedničkom zadatku. Sažetavamo metode, resurse i alate koje koriste sudjelujući timovi, uz fokus na tehnike i resurse koje su posebno korisne. Takođe analiziramo sisteme za konsekvenu predrasu prema određenoj rasi ili spolu. Podaci su slobodno dostupni da bismo dalje poboljšali razumijevanje o tome kako ljudi prenose emocije putem jezika.', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2018 1: Wax ku saabsan Tweetka, kaas oo ku jira shaqaalooyin kala duduwan oo ku saabsan dhibaatada qof ku saabsan Tweetkooda. Shaqad kasta waxaan ka abuurnay macluumaad la qoray oo ka yimid Ingiriis, Carabi iyo Isbanish. Shaqooyinka gaarka ah waa: 1. daryeelka fikrada, 2. fasaxa caadiga ah, 3. qof walbo (xisaabta) fasalka caadiga ah iyo 5. fasaxa hissiga Shan iyo toddobaatan koox (qiyaastii 200 koox) waxay ka qeybqaateen shaqada la qaybsan. Waxaynu kooxda qayb-gelinta ku qornaa qaababka, rasiliyadaha, iyo qalabka lagu isticmaalayo, kaas oo focus ugu leh teknolojiyada iyo maalmaha ay si gaar ah u faa’iido leeyihiin. Sidoo kale waxaynu wax u baaraynaa nidaamka ku habboon dabeecada gaarka ah ama jinsiga. The data is made freely available to further improve our understanding of how people convey emotions through language.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Påverkan i tweets, som innehåller en rad underuppgifter om att härleda en persons påverkande tillstånd från deras tweet. För varje uppgift skapade vi märkta data från engelska, arabiska och spanska tweets. De enskilda uppgifterna är: 1. regression av känslointensitet, 2. emotionell intensitet ordinell klassificering, 3. valens (sentiment) regression, 4. valens ordinell klassificering, och 5. känsloklassificering. Sjuttiofem team (cirka 200 teammedlemmar) deltog i den delade uppgiften. Vi sammanfattar de metoder, resurser och verktyg som används av de deltagande teamen, med fokus på de tekniker och resurser som är särskilt användbara. Vi analyserar även system för konsekvent bias mot en viss ras eller kön. Uppgifterna görs fritt tillgängliga för att ytterligare förbättra vår förståelse för hur människor förmedlar känslor genom språk.', 'ta': 'SemEval-2018 பணியை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் 1: Tweets-ல் விளைவு, அதில் ஒரு நபரின் பாதிப்பு நிலையை பாதிக்கும் பொருட்டு சில துணை பணிகள் உள்ளன ஒவ்வொரு செயலுக்கும், நாங்கள் ஆங்கிலத்தில், அரபி மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் தொடர்புகளிலிருந்து குறிப்பிட தனிப்பட்ட பணிகள்: 1. உணர்வு உயரத்தை மறுத்தல், 2. உணர்வுகள் சாதாரண வகுப்பு, 3. பழக்கு (உணர்வு) திருத்தம், 4. valence ordinal classification, and 5.  உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தல். ஏழு ஐந்து குழுக்கள் (குறைந்த 200 அணி உறுப்பினர்) பங்கிடப்பட்ட பணியில் பங்கிடப்பட்டது. குழுக்களால் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறைமைகள், மூலங்கள், கருவிகளை சுருக்குகிறோம், குறிப்பாக பயனுள்ள தொழில்நுட்பம் மற்றும் வளங்கள்  நாம் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட இனம் அல்லது பெண்களுக்கு தொடர்ந்து பிரச்சனைகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். மொழியில் மக்கள் எப்படி உணர்வுகளை செய்யும் என்று உணர்வுகளை மூலம் அதிகரிக்கும் புரிந்து கொள்வதற்காக தக', 'ur': 'ہم ٹویٹ میں سموئل-2018 ٹاکس ۱ کو پیش کرتے ہیں، جس میں ایک شخص کے ٹویٹ سے اثر دینے کے بارے میں ایک جماعت مضبوط بات شامل ہے. ہم نے ہر کام کے لئے انگلیسی, عربی اور اسپانیایی ٹویٹ سے لکھی ہوئی ڈاٹ پیدا کیا۔ ایک شخص کے کام ہیں: 1. احساسات تیز تراش، 2. احساس تیز تیز نظامی کلاسیفوں، 3. والنس (احساس) ریگرس، 4. اور 5. احساسات کلاسپین. پانچ ٹیموں (حدود ۲۰۰ ٹیموں میں) شریک کام میں شریک ہوئے۔ ہم طریقے، سرمایہ، اور ابزار کے ذریعہ شرکت گروہوں کے ذریعہ استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں، ان طریقوں اور سرمایہ پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں جو مخصوص مفید ہیں. ہم نے بھی ایک مخصوص نسل یا جنس کی نسبت ثابت ہونے کے لئے سیستموں کو تحقیق کرلیا ہے۔ ڈیٹا آزاد طور پر موجود ہے کہ ہمارے سمجھنے کے لئے کس طرح لوگوں کو زبان سے احساسات پہنچاتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz SemEval-2018 Vazifa 1: Twitterda muammolar, bu Twitter bilan odamning holatini qo'shish uchun bir necha vazifalar bor. Har bir vazifa uchun biz ingliz, arab va Ispanchadan foydalanuvchilarga yozilgan maʼlumot yaratdik. Har bir vazifalar: 1. hissiyotni qo'yishni qo'yish, 2. hissiyotni oddiy darajada katta qilish, 3. o'zgartirish oddiy darajada va 5. hissiyot darajasi. 7-5 guruhi (200 guruh аъзолари) o'xshash vazifasiga qayta ishlashdi. Biz guruhlar bilan ishlatilgan usullar, rasmlar, va asboblar muhimiy foydalanadigan usullarni hisoblash. Biz bir necha rasm yoki jinsiy bilan bir qanday taʼminlovchi tizimni analyzmiz. Maʼlumotlar tilni tillar orqali o'ylab hissiyotlarni o'rganishga o'rganish uchun foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu Nhiệm vụ SemEvol 1: Đặt tác dụng trong Tweet, gồm cả một loạt các yêu cầu phụ dẫn đến việc ngụ ý trạng thái tình cảm của một người trên Twitter. Chúng tôi tạo ra các dữ liệu bằng tiếng Anh, tiếng Ả Rập và tiếng Tây Ban Nha. Nhiệm vụ cá nhân là: 1. sự giảm đau cảm xúc, 2. phẩm chất xúc động, 3. đúng mức độ đúng đắn. Mã hóa, phân loại bình thường, và 5. Cảm xúc phân loại. Bảy mươi năm đội (khoảng 200Rs) tham gia vào cuộc thi chung Chúng ta tổng hợp các phương pháp, nguồn lực và các công cụ được các đội đã tham gia, tập trung vào các kỹ thuật và nguồn lực đặc biệt có ích. Chúng tôi cũng phân tích hệ thống có khuynh hướng liên quan đến chủng tộc hoặc giới tính. Dữ liệu được cung cấp tự do để nâng cao sự hiểu biết của chúng ta về cách người ta truyền cảm xúc qua ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Представяме задача 1: Въздействие в туитове, която включва набор от подзадачи за извеждане на засегнатото състояние на човек от техния туит. За всяка задача създадохме обозначени данни от английски, арабски и испански туитове. Индивидуалните задачи са: 1. регресия на емоционалната интензивност, 2. Класификация на емоционалната интензивност, 3. валентна (сантиментална) регресия, 4. валентна класификация и 5. Класификация на емоциите. Седемдесет и пет отбора (около 200 членове на екипа) участваха в споделената задача. Обобщаваме методите, ресурсите и инструментите, използвани от участващите екипи, с акцент върху техниките и ресурсите, които са особено полезни. Също така анализираме системите за последователни пристрастия към определена раса или пол. Данните се предоставят свободно, за да подобрим допълнително разбирането ни за това как хората предават емоции чрез езика.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Påvirkning i tweets, som indeholder en række underopgaver om at udlede en persons påvirkningstilstand fra deres tweet. For hver opgave oprettede vi mærkede data fra engelsk, arabisk og spansk tweets. De enkelte opgaver er: 1. regression af følelsesintensitet, 2. følelsesintensitet ordinær klassificering, 3. valens (sentiment) regression, 4. valence ordinær klassificering, og 5. følelsesklassificering. 75 hold (omkring 200 teammedlemmer) deltog i den fælles opgave. Vi opsummerer de metoder, ressourcer og værktøjer, der anvendes af de deltagende teams, med fokus på de teknikker og ressourcer, der er særligt nyttige. Vi analyserer også systemer for konsekvent bias over for en bestemt race eller køn. Dataene stilles frit til rådighed for yderligere at forbedre vores forståelse af, hvordan mennesker formidler følelser gennem sprog.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo zadatak 1. SemEval-2018: utjecaj na Tweets, koji uključuje gomilu podataka o infekciji utjecaja osobe iz njihovog tweet a. Za svaki zadatak smo stvorili označene podatke iz engleskih, arapskih i španjolskih tweets. Osobni zadatak su: 1. regresija emocionalne intenzitete, 2. Organalna klasifikacija emocionalne intenzitete, 3. valencija (osjećaj) regresija, 4. klasifikacija odgovarajućih organa i 5. klasifikacija emocija. Sedamdeset pet timova (oko 200 članova tima) učestvovali su u zajedničkom zadatku. Sažetavamo metode, resurse i alate koje koriste sudjelujući timovi, s fokusom na tehnike i resurse koje su posebno korisne. Također analiziramo sustave za konsekventne predrasude prema određenoj rasi ili spolu. Podaci su slobodno dostupni kako bi nas dalje poboljšali razumijevanje o tome kako ljudi prenose emocije putem jezika.', 'nl': 'We presenteren de SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Affect in Tweets, die een reeks subtaken bevat over het afleiden van de affectieve toestand van een persoon uit zijn tweet. Voor elke taak hebben we gelabelde gegevens gemaakt van Engelse, Arabische en Spaanse tweets. De afzonderlijke taken zijn: 1. Regressie van emotie-intensiteit, 2. emotionele intensiteit ordinale classificatie, 3. valentie (sentiment) regressie, 4. Valence ordinal classification, en 5. emotionele classificatie. Vijfenzeventig teams (ongeveer 200 teamleden) namen deel aan de gedeelde taak. We vatten de methoden, middelen en tools samen die door de deelnemende teams worden gebruikt, met een focus op de technieken en middelen die bijzonder nuttig zijn. We analyseren ook systemen voor consistente vooroordelen ten opzichte van een bepaald ras of geslacht. De gegevens worden vrij beschikbaar gesteld om ons begrip van hoe mensen emoties overbrengen door middel van taal verder te verbeteren.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren die SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets, die eine Reihe von Teilaufgaben enthält, um den affektualen Zustand einer Person aus ihrem Tweet abzuleiten. Für jede Aufgabe haben wir beschriftete Daten aus englischen, arabischen und spanischen Tweets erstellt. Die einzelnen Aufgaben sind: 1. Regression der Emotionsintensität, 2. Ordinale Klassifizierung der Emotionsintensität, 3. Valenz (Sentiment) Regression, 4. Einstufung der Valenz-Verordnung und 5. Emotionsklassifikation. Fünfundsiebzig Teams (etwa 200-Teammitglieder) nahmen an der gemeinsamen Aufgabe teil. Wir fassen die Methoden, Ressourcen und Werkzeuge der teilnehmenden Teams zusammen, mit einem Fokus auf die Techniken und Ressourcen, die besonders nützlich sind. Wir analysieren auch Systeme auf konsistente Bias gegenüber einer bestimmten Rasse oder Geschlecht. Die Daten werden frei zugänglich gemacht, um unser Verständnis dafür zu verbessern, wie Menschen Emotionen durch Sprache vermitteln.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets, yang termasuk sejumlah subtasks tentang menyimpulkan keadaan efektual seseorang dari tweet mereka. Untuk setiap tugas, kami menciptakan data yang ditabel dari tweet bahasa Inggris, Arab, dan Spanyol. Tugas individu adalah: 1. regresi intensitas emosi, 2. Intensitas emosi klasifikasi ordinal, 3. regresi valensi (perasaan), 4. Klasifikasi ordinal valensi, dan 5. klasifikasi emosi. Tujuh puluh lima tim (sekitar 200 anggota tim) berpartisipasi dalam tugas bersama. Kami mempersingkatkan metode, sumber daya, dan alat yang digunakan oleh tim yang berpartisipasi, dengan fokus pada teknik dan sumber daya yang sangat berguna. Kami juga menganalisis sistem untuk bias konsisten terhadap ras atau jenis tertentu. Data tersedia secara bebas untuk meningkatkan pemahaman kita tentang bagaimana orang menyebarkan emosi melalui bahasa.', 'ko': '우리는SemEval-18 미션1: 트위터의 감정을 보여줬는데 트위터에서 한 사람의 감정 상태를 추정하는 일련의 하위 미션을 포함한다.모든 임무에 대해 우리는 영어, 아랍어, 스페인어 추문에서 표기 데이터를 만든다.개인 임무는 다음과 같다.정서 강도 회귀.정서 강도 순서 분류.가격 회귀가격순 분류정서 분류.공유 임무에는 75개 팀(약 200명의 팀원)이 참여했다.우리는 참여팀이 사용하는 방법, 자원과 도구를 총괄하고 특히 유용한 기술과 자원을 중점적으로 소개했다.특정 종족이나 성별에 대한 체계적인 편견도 분석했다.이러한 데이터는 우리가 사람들이 어떻게 언어를 통해 감정을 표현하는지에 대한 이해를 더욱 높일 수 있도록 무료로 제공된다.', 'fa': 'ما وظیفه\u200cی نیم Eval-2018 را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: تاثیر در تویت\u200cها، که شامل یک مجموعه از زیر پاسخ\u200cها در مورد تحریک وضعیت اثر یک نفر از تویت\u200cهایشان است. برای هر کاری، ما داده\u200cهای نوشته شده از tweets انگلیسی، عربی و اسپانیایی ایجاد کردیم. وظیفه\u200cهای شخصی: ۱. افسردگی شدت احساسات، ۲. ترکیب قوی احساسات، ۳. والینس (احساس) بازگشت، ۴. و پنج تنظیم قانونی ارتباط. محرمانه احساسات. هفتاد و پنج تیم (حدود ۲۰۰ اعضای تیم) در کار مشترک شرکت کردند. ما روش\u200cها، منابع\u200cها و ابزار\u200cهایی که توسط تیم\u200cهای مشترک استفاده می\u200cکنند را جمع می\u200cکنیم، با تمرکز روی تکنیک\u200cها و منابع\u200cهای مخصوص مفید است. ما همچنین سیستم\u200cهایی را برای هماهنگی با یک نژاد یا جنس خاص تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. اطلاعات آزاد در دسترس قرار داده می شود تا بیشتر درک ما را در مورد چگونه مردم احساسات را با زبان تحویل می دهند.', 'sw': 'Tulifanya kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Inaathirika kwenye twita, ambazo ni pamoja na makundi mengi ya kazi za kuathiri hali ya mtu kutoka kwenye twita yao. Kwa kila kazi, tulitengeneza taarifa zilizotajwa kutoka twiti za Kiingereza, Kiarabu na Kihispania. Kazi binafsi ni: 1. emotion intensity regression, 2.  hisia kwa kiwango cha kawaida, 3. upinzani (hisia) 4. usambazaji wa kawaida, na 5. utangazaji wa hisia. Timu sabiini na tano (takriban wanachama wa timu 200) walishiriki katika kazi hiyo ya kushirikiana. Tunajaribu mbinu, rasilimali na vifaa vinavyotumiwa na timu za ushiriki, kwa lengo la teknolojia na rasilimali zinazofaa hasa. Kadhalika tunachambua mfumo wa upendeleo wa rangi au jinsia. Takwimu hizo zinapatikana kwa uhuru ili kuongeza uelewa wetu wa namna watu wanavyoeleza hisia kupitia lugha.', 'tr': 'SemEval-2018 Taýgyzyny 1-nji Görevi 1: Týuterler içinde nähili üýtgeşik bolup geçirilýäris. Týuterlerinden biri nähili kişiniň etkisi ýagdaýyny goýýar. Her zadyň üçin iňlisçe, arapça we espanyol tweetlerinden etiket edilen maglumatlary bejerdik. Şahsy zadlar 1. duýgyş gödeklik regressiýasy, 2. Duýgy göwnünlik düzgün klasifikasy, 3. regresyon, 4 Söýgüliler duýgyş derejesi Yedek bäş topar (200 topar adamy ýakynda) paylaşyk işine goşuldy. Biz toparlar tarapyndan ulanylan yöntemleri, çeşmeleri we çykyş hasaplamalary we paýlaşmaly tekniklere we çeşmelere üns berýäris. Biz hem bir ýarym ýa-a ýrym ýa-da siňlik täsirlere daimi tertiblemek üçin sistemalary çözürýäris. Maglumatlar çykarmak üçin adamlaryň dili bilen duýgyny nädip özlerini tanyşyp bilmegimizi gowurak etmek üçin özgürläk mejbur berilýär.', 'af': "Ons stel die SemEval-2018 taak 1: Afteken in Tweets, wat insluit 'n rekening van subtaske op die afvloekte staat van 'n persoon van hulle tweet. Vir elke taak het ons gemaak gemerkte data van Engels, Arabs en Spaanse tweets. Die individuele taak is: 1. emosie intensiteit regresie, 2. emosie intensiteit ordeel klasifikasie, 3. valence (sentiment) regresie, 4. valence ordenaal klasifikasie en 5. emosie klasifikasie. Sewentig vyf teams (omtrent 200 span lede) het in die gedeelde taak gedeel. Ons versamel die metodes, hulpbronne en hulpbronne wat deur die deelnadeerde teams gebruik word, met 'n fokus op die teknike en hulpbronne wat spesiaal nuttig is. Ons analiseer ook stelsels vir konsistente voorspoedige teenoor 'n bepaalde rase of gender. Die data is vry beskikbaar om ons verstanding verder te verbeter van hoe mense emosies deur taal verskyn.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets, i cili përfshin një sërë nënpyetjeve për përfundimin e gjendjes ndikuese të një person nga tweeti i tyre. Për çdo detyrë, krijuam të dhëna të etiketuara nga tweetet angleze, arabe dhe spanjolle. Detyrat individuale janë: 1. emotion intensity regression, 2.  Intensiteti i emocioneve klasifikimi ordinal, 3. Regresioni i valencës, 4. klasifikimi ordinal i valencës, dhe 5. klasifikimi i emocioneve. Shtatëdhjetë e pesë ekipe (rreth 200 anëtarë të ekipit) morën pjesë në detyrën e përbashkët. Ne përmbledhim metodat, burimet dhe mjetet e përdorura nga ekipet pjesëmarrëse, me një përqëndrim në teknikat dhe burimet që janë veçanërisht të dobishme. Ne gjithashtu analizojmë sistemet për paragjykime të konsistente ndaj një race apo gjini të veçantë. Të dhënat janë bërë të disponueshme lirisht për të përmirësuar më tej kuptimin tonë se si njerëzit transmetojnë emocionet nëpërmjet gjuhës.', 'am': 'የሳምEval-2018 ስራ 1፣ በትዊተር ላይ ተግባር እናቀርባታለን፤ ከtweeteው የሚታወቀውን ሰው ሥርዓት በመጥፎ የሚነካውን መልዕክቶች እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ለሁሉም ስራ እንግሊዝኛ፣ ዐረብኛ እና ስፓኒሽ ትዊተቶችን የጽሑፍ መረጃዎችን ፈጠርን፡፡ አንድ የስብሰባ ጉዳይ ቁጥጥር 2 የስህተት ግንኙነት አዳላዊ ክፍል 3 valence (sentiment) regression, 4. የግንኙነት ትርጉም እና 5. የአሳብ ክፍል ሰባ-አምስት ቡድን (200 የቡድን አባላት) በተካፈሉት ስራ ተጋጠሙ፡፡ We summarize the methods, resources, and tools used by the participating teams, with a focus on the techniques and resources that are particularly useful.  ደግሞም ስርዓቶችን በተለየ ትውልድ ወይም የሴት ጥያቄ እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ አዳራዎች በቋንቋ እንዴት እንደሚያሳድሩ እናውቃችንን ለማድረግ አፍቃድ ይቻላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի առաջին հանձնարարությունը՝ Թվիթերում ազդեցություն, որը ներառում է մի շարք ենթահարցեր, որոնք մարդկանց ազդեցության վիճակը իրենց թվիթերից դուրս բերում են: Յուրաքանչյուր խնդրի համար մենք ստեղծեցինք անգլերենի, արաբերենի և իսպաներենի թվիթերի վրա նշանակված տվյալներ: Հիմնական առաջադրանքները՝ 1: զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության վերադառնալը, 2: զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության օրինակ դասակարգման, 3: վալենցիայի (զգացմունքների) ռեգրեսիան, 4: և 5: զգացմունքների դասակարգում: Յոթանասունհինգ թիմ (մոտ 200 թիմ անդամներ) մասնակցել էին ընդհանուր խնդրին: Մենք համառոտագրում ենք մասնակիցների կողմից օգտագործվող մեթոդները, ռեսուրսները և գործիքները, կենտրոնացնելով հատկապես օգտակար մեթոդների և ռեսուրսների վրա: Մենք նաև վերլուծում ենք համակարգերը որոշակի ռասայի կամ գենդերային հարաբերության համար: Տվյալները ազատ հասանելի են, որպեսզի ավելի լավ հասկանանք, թե ինչպես են մարդիկ տարածում զգացմունքները լեզվի միջոցով:', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo zadatak 1. SemEval-2018: utjecaj na Tweets, koji uključuje gomilu podataka o uvođenju utjecaja osobe iz njihovog tweet a. Za svaki zadatak smo stvorili označene podatke iz engleskih, arapskih i španjolskih tweeta. Individualni zadatak su 1. regresija emocionalne intenzitete, 2. Organalna klasifikacija emocionalne intenzitete, 3. valencija (osjećaj) regresija, 4. klasifikacija odgovarajućih organa i 5. klasifikacija emocija. Sedamdeset pet tima (oko 200 članova tima) sudjelovali su u zajedničkom zadatku. Sažetavamo metode, resurse i alate koje koriste sudjelujući timovi, s fokusom na tehnike i resurse koje su posebno korisne. Također analiziramo sisteme za konsekventne predrasude prema određenoj rasi ili spolu. Podaci su slobodno dostupni kako bi nas dalje poboljšali razumijevanje o tome kako ljudi prenose emocije putem jezika.', 'ca': "Presentam el SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets, que inclou una sèrie de subtaskes sobre deduir l'estat afectual d'una person a del seu tweet. Per cada tasca vam crear dades etiquetades de tweets anglès, àrab i espanyol. Les tasques individuals són: 1. la regressió de la intensitat emocional, 2. classificació ordinal de la intensitat emocional, 3. la regressió de valencia (sentiment), 4. classificació ordinal de valencia, i 5. classificació emocional. Seventy-five teams (about 200 team members) participated in the shared task.  Resumem els mètodes, recursos i eines utilitzats pels equips participants, centrant-nos en les tècniques i recursos particularment útils. També analitzem sistemes de bias consistent cap a una raça o gènere particular. Les dades estan lliurament disponibles per millorar més la nostra comprensió de com la gent transmet emocions a través del llenguatge.", 'bn': 'আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের সামনে উপস্থিত করছি: টুইটারে প্রভাব ফেলেছে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে টুইট থেকে কোন ব্যক্তির প্রভাবিত অবস্থাকে আক্রান্ত করার ব প্রত্যেক কাজের জন্য আমরা ইংরেজী, আরবী এবং স্প্যানিশ টুইট থেকে লেবেল ডাটা তৈরি করেছি। ব্যক্তিগত কাজ হল: ১। অনুভূতি পুনরুদ্ধার, ২। অনুভূতি সাধারণ বিভাগ, ৩। ভ্যালেন্স (অনুভূতি) পুনরাবৃত্তি, ৪। valence ordinal classification, and 5.  আবেগের শ্রেণীকরণ ৭৫ দল (প্রায় ২০০ টিম সদস্য) এই শেয়ার কর্মসূচিতে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে। অংশগ্রহণকারী দলের দ্বারা ব্যবহৃত পদ্ধতি, সম্পদ এবং টুলের সংক্ষেপ আমরা সংক্ষেপ করি, যা প্রযুক্তি এবং সম্পদের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করি। আমরা সিস্টেম বিশ্লেষণ করি বিশেষ জাতি বা লিঙ্গের দিকে স্থায়ী বিভ্রান্তির জন্য। মানুষ কিভাবে ভাষার মাধ্যমে অনুভূতি প্রকাশ করে আমাদের বুঝতে স্বাধীনতা পারে।', 'az': 'Biz SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets içində müxtəlif bir insanın twetdən təsirli durumunu düşürmək haqqında bir dəstə istifadə edirik. Hər iş üçün İngilizce, Arapça və İspanyolca tweetlərdən etiketli məlumatlar yaratdıq. Bütün işlər: 1. emosyon şiddəti regresiya, 2. duygusal şiddətli düzgün klasifikasyon, 3. Valans (sentiment) regresiya, 4. və 5. duygusal klasifikasyon. Yeddi-beş takım (yaklaşık 200 takım üyesi) paylaşılan işlərdə iştirak etdi. Biz həmçinin istifadə edən dəstələrin istifadə edilən metodları, kaynaqları və vasitələri, özlərinə də faydalı olan tekniklərə və resurslarına odaqlayırıq. Biz də müəyyən bir ırq ya da cins tərəfindən müəyyən bir təsiri üçün sistemləri analiz edirik. Bu məlumatlar insanların dil vasitəsilə hissləri necə götürdüyünü daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün özgür olaraq faydalanır.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets, joka sisältää joukon alitehtäviä, joiden avulla voidaan päätellä henkilön affectuaalinen tila hänen tweetistään. Jokaiseen tehtävään luotiin merkittyjä tietoja englannin-, arabian- ja espanjankielisistä tweeteistä. Yksittäiset tehtävät ovat: 1. tunteiden intensiteetin regressio, 2. emotion intensity ordinal classification, 3. Valenssi (tunteiden) regressio, 4. valenssiordinaaliluokitus, ja 5. Tunteiden luokittelu. Yhteiseen tehtävään osallistui 75 tiimiä (noin 200 tiimin jäsentä). Yhteenveto osallistujien käyttämistä menetelmistä, resursseista ja työkaluista keskittyy erityisesti niihin tekniikoihin ja resursseihin, jotka ovat erityisen hyödyllisiä. Analysoimme myös järjestelmiä johdonmukaisen puolueellisuuden suhteen tiettyyn rotuun tai sukupuoleen. Tiedot ovat vapaasti saatavilla, jotta voimme edelleen parantaa ymmärrystämme siitä, miten ihmiset välittävät tunteita kielen kautta.', 'cs': 'Představujeme SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets, který obsahuje řadu dílčích úkolů na odvození efektního stavu osoby z jejich tweetu. Pro každý úkol jsme vytvořili označená data z anglických, arabských a španělských tweetů. Jednotlivé úkoly jsou: 1. Regrese intenzity emocí, 2. intenzita emocí ordinální klasifikace, 3. valenční regrese, 4. Valence ordinální klasifikace a 5. klasifikace emocí. Společného úkolu se podílelo sedmdesát pět týmů (asi 200 členů týmu). Shrnujeme metody, zdroje a nástroje používané zúčastněnými týmy se zaměřením na techniky a zdroje, které jsou obzvláště užitečné. Také analyzujeme systémy pro konzistentní zaujatost vůči určité rasě nebo pohlaví. Data jsou volně dostupná, abychom dále zlepšili naše pochopení toho, jak lidé prostřednictvím jazyka přenášejí emoce.', 'et': 'Tutvustame SemEval-2018 ülesannet 1: mõju tweetides, mis sisaldab hulka alamülesandeid inimese mõjutava seisundi järeldamiseks tema tweetist. Iga ülesande jaoks loosime sildistatud andmed inglise, araabia ja hispaania säutsudest. Üksikud ülesanded on: 1. emotsioonide intensiivsuse regressioon, 2. emotsioonide intensiivsuse ordinaalne klassifikatsioon, 3. valentsi (sentimentaalse) regressioon, 4. valentsi ordinaalne klassifikatsioon ja 5. emotsioonide klassifikatsioon. Ühises ülesandes osales 75 meeskonda (umbes 200 meeskonnaliiget). Võtame kokku meetodid, ressursid ja tööriistad, mida osalevad meeskonnad kasutavad, keskendudes tehnikatele ja ressurssidele, mis on eriti kasulikud. Samuti analüüsime süsteeme järjepideva eelarvamuse kohta konkreetse rassi või soo suhtes. Andmed tehakse vabalt kättesaadavaks, et veelgi paremini mõista, kuidas inimesed keele kaudu emotsioone edastavad.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe semebal-2008 task 1: AfEffect nang Tuts, sing katsa kelompok tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno barang dumadhi kuwi nggawe barang kelas perbudhakan karo winih dhéwé kuwi tuwit. Sampeyan nganggo, awak dhéwé nggawe daty sing paling kanggo basa Inggris, Perancis karo kiper karo Spanish. tab ReplyForward string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Regresyon, 4. Global bending"), ("Relative position to a reference point defines global bending direction and amount"), "bender iCalImp 75 cm (about 200 cm) ngupakan ni mungkun gawe ngupakan negoro Awak dhéwé sumungane gambaran sistem, recursi lan alat sing gambar nggawe Grup nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo tukang mruput kanggo segala apat kanggo kelas. Awakdhéwé éntuk kang dipuluhayo kanggo luwih ngerasaé awak dhéwé ning langgar piye cara-uluh sing luwih apik.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים את המשימה 1 של SemEval-2018: השפעה בטוויטים, אשר כולל מערכת של תוצאות על המצב השפיע של אדם מהטוויטים שלהם. לכל משימה, יצרנו נתונים מסומנים באנגלית, ערבית וספרדית. המשימות האישיות הן: 1. חזרה באינטנסיבות רגשות, 2. כיוון מיוחד של אינטנסיבות רגשות, 3. חזרה (רגשות), 4. כיוון רציני ואולנס, ו-5. מסווג רגשות. שבעים וחמש קבוצות (בערך 200 חברים בקבוצה) השתתפו במשימה המשותפת. אנו מסדרים את השיטות, המשאבים והכלים שהשתמשו על ידי הקבוצות המשתתפות, עם התמקדות בטכניקות והמשאבים שימושיים במיוחד. אנו גם מנתחים מערכות לחווה קבועה כלפי גזע או מין מסוים. The data is made freely available to further improve our understanding of how people convey emotions through language.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nalogo 1 SemEval-2018: Vpliv v tweets, ki vključuje vrsto podopravil o sklepanju vplivnega stanja osebe iz njegovega tweeta. Za vsako opravilo smo ustvarili označene podatke iz angleških, arabskih in španskih tweetov. Posamezne naloge so: 1. Regresija intenzivnosti čustev, 2. redna razvrstitev intenzivnosti čustev, 3. regresija valentnosti (sentimentalnega), 4. valenčna klasifikacija in 5. Klasifikacija čustev. V skupni nalogi je sodelovalo petinsedemdeset ekip (približno 200 članov ekipe). Povzemamo metode, vire in orodja, ki jih uporabljajo sodelujoče ekipe, s poudarkom na tehnikah in virih, ki so posebej koristni. Analiziramo tudi sisteme za dosledno pristranskost do določene rase ali spola. Podatki so prosto dostopni za nadaljnje boljše razumevanje, kako ljudje prenašajo čustva skozi jezik.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da aikin SemEV-2018 1: Mai Jayya ne a cikin Twitter, wanda ke ƙunsa da wasu taskõki masu yin zartar da halin mutum daga Twitter. Ga kõwane aikin, Mun sami data da aka rubuta daga Ingiriya, Larabci da Isbanish. Kayan aiki guda shine: 1. kashi na hisia, 2. Shirin hisãbi na dabar-dabar, 3. dictionary variant kure na ɗabi'a da 5. Shirin hisãbi. Team saba'in shan (takin 200 na jamii) suka yi rabon aikin da shi. Munã ƙararin hanyõyin, resource da kayan aiki da ke amfani da jama'a mãsu haɗuwa, da fokus a kan masu kunnufi da masu amfani da. Ana yi anayya ga tsarin da ke sami zuwa wani rasa ko jini. An samar da data buɗaɗe dõmin a ƙara mana fahimtar jinsi mutane ke faɗa hisãbi zuwa harshen.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་SemEval-2018 ལས་ཀ་གནད་དོན་ལྡན་ཞིག་འདྲ་ཡིན། ཨ་ཕི་གླིང་ནང་དུ་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་རེ་རེར་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་། ཨ་རབ་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག་གི་འགོད་ཐེངས་དང་། སྒེར་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དེ་༡ སེམས་ཚོར་མཚམས་བཅད་ཀྱིས་མཚམས་གཉིས། སེམས་ཚོར་མཁའ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་3། valence (sentiment)regression, 4 དབྱེ་བ་དབྱེ་བ་དང་༥། སེམས་ཚོར་དབྱེ་བ། ཚོ་ཁག་༧༠(དམག་མི་ཁང་གླེང་སྡོམ་༢༠༠)ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་འདུག ང་ཚོས་དབུལ་ཕྱོགས་སྤྱད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ། རྒྱུ་དངོས། མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་སྤྱོད་པའི་ལག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཚུ་ དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས ང་ཚོས་རིགས་སྐྱེས་བ་དང་མིང་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་རིམ་པ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལུས་སྔར་ཡོད་པའི་མ སྐད་ཡིག་དང་མི་མང་གིས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། རང་དབང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཆ་འཕེལ་རྒྱས་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Domain Adaptation for Affect in Tweets', 'ar': 'SeerNet في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: تكييف المجال للتأثير في التغريدات', 'es': 'SeerNet en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Adaptación del dominio para el efecto en los tuits', 'fr': "SeerNet à SemeVal-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Adaptation de domaine pour l'affect dans les tweets", 'pt': 'SeerNet na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Adaptação de Domínio para Afeto em Tweets', 'ja': 'SeerNet at SemEval -2018 Task 1: Domain Adaptation for Affect in Tweets', 'zh': 'SeerNetňťĘSemEval-2018ňŐí1:ŠÄĘŠľçńŞşŠëÇŠčôń╣őňčč', 'ru': 'SeerNet на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Адаптация домена для воздействия в твитах', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर SeerNet: Tweets में प्रभाव के लिए डोमेन अनुकूलन', 'ga': 'SeerNet ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Oiriúnú Fearainn le hAghaidh Tionchair in Tweets', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Προσαρμογή Τομέα για Επίδραση στα Τουίτερ', 'ka': 'SeerNet-ს SemEval-2018 დავალება 1: დიომინური ადაპტიფიკაცია ტვირში', 'hu': 'SeerNet a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Domain adaptáció a tweetekben', 'it': "SeerNet a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Adattamento del dominio per l'impatto nei tweet", 'lt': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Domain Adaptation for Affect in Tweets', 'mk': 'SeerNet на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Адаптација на доменот за влијание на твитови', 'kk': 'SeerNet 1- деген тапсырма: Твиттердегі домен адаптациясы', 'ms': 'SeerNet pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Penyesuaian Domain untuk Affect dalam Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ സീര്\u200dനെറ്റ്: ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'SeerNet f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Adattament tad-dominju għall-Affett fit-Tweets', 'mn': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Domain Adaptation for Effects in Tweets', 'pl': 'SeerNet w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Adaptacja domeny dla efektu w Tweetach', 'no': 'SeerNet på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Domeneadaptasjon for effekt i tweets', 'ro': 'SeerNet la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Adaptarea domeniului pentru afectarea tweeturilor', 'sr': 'SeerNet na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Domena adaptacija za uticaj na Tweets', 'so': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Domain Adaptation for Affect in twitter', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'SeerNet på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Domänanpassning för påverkan i tweets', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் பார்ப்பின் வலைப்பு', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں SeerNet: ٹویٹ میں اثر کے لئے دامین اڈپٹیٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'SeerNet ở SemEvl-208 Task 1: Phục chỉnh miền cho kết nối trong Tweet', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Адаптация на домейн за влияние в туитове', 'nl': 'SeerNet bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Domeinaanpassing voor Affect in Tweets', 'hr': 'SeerNet na semiEval-2018 zadatak 1: Adaptacija domena za utjecaje na Tweets', 'ko': 'SeerNet이 SemEval-18 작업 1: 트윗에 영향을 미치는 도메인 적응', 'de': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Domain Adaption for Affect in Tweets', 'id': 'SeerNet di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Adaptasi Domain untuk Affect dalam Tweets', 'da': 'SeerNet på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Domænetilpasning til påvirkning i tweets', 'tr': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Domain Adaptation for Affect in Tweets', 'sw': 'SeerNet kwenye SemEval-2018 Kazi 1: Picha ya Domain kwa ajili ya Affective kwenye twita', 'fa': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Adaptation Domain for Effects in Tweets', 'af': 'SeerNet by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: Domein aanpassing vir afvloek in tweets', 'sq': 'SeerNet në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Adaptation of Domain for Affect in Tweets', 'am': 'ስራ 1: Domain Adaptation for Affection in Tweets', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের সিয়ার নেটওয়ার্ক: টুইটে প্রভাবিত ডোমেইন অ্যাডাপ্টেশন', 'az': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Domain Adaptation for Effects in Tweets', 'ca': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Domain Adaptation for Affect in Tweets', 'hy': 'SERNet-ը, որը գտնվում է SEMewal-2018 թվիթերում 1-րդ հանձնարարում. Աշխատությունը հարմարեցնում է բնագավառը', 'cs': 'SeerNet na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Adaptace domény pro efekt ve tweetech', 'fi': 'SeerNet SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 1: Verkkotunnuksen mukauttaminen affectiin tweeteissä', 'et': 'SeerNet SemEval-2018 ülesanne 1: domeeni kohandamine mõju jaoks tweetides', 'bs': 'SeerNet na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Domena adaptacija za uticaj u Tweets', 'jv': 'Sendnet at semi-inval-2008 task 1: domain Adjustation for AfEffectt in Two', 'sk': 'SeerNet na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Prilagoditev domen za vpliv v tweetih', 'he': 'SeerNet ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: התאמה Domain for Affect in Tweets', 'ha': 'SearNet at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 1: Domen Adapption for Affect in Twitter', 'bo': 'SeerNet at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Domain Adaptation for Affect in Tweets'}
{'en': 'The paper describes the best performing system for the SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets(English) sub-tasks. The system focuses on the ordinal classification and regression sub-tasks for valence and emotion. For ordinal classification valence is classified into 7 different classes ranging from -3 to 3 whereas emotion is classified into 4 different classes 0 to 3 separately for each emotion namely anger, fear, joy and sadness. The regression sub-tasks estimate the intensity of valence and each emotion. The system performs domain adaptation of 4 different models and creates an ensemble to give the final prediction. The proposed system achieved 1stposition out of 75 teams which participated in the fore-mentioned sub-tasks. We outperform the baseline model by margins ranging from 49.2 % to 76.4 %, thus, pushing the state-of-the-art significantly.', 'ar': 'تصف الورقة النظام الأفضل أداءً للمهام الفرعية لـ SemEval-2018 Affect in Twitter (الإنجليزية). يركز النظام على مهام التصنيف الترتيبي والانحدار للتكافؤ والعاطفة. بالنسبة للتصنيف الترتيبي ، يتم تصنيف التكافؤ إلى 7 فئات مختلفة تتراوح من -3 إلى 3 بينما يتم تصنيف العاطفة إلى 4 فئات مختلفة من 0 إلى 3 بشكل منفصل لكل عاطفة وهي الغضب والخوف والفرح والحزن. تقدر مهام الانحدار الفرعية شدة التكافؤ وكل عاطفة. يقوم النظام بتكييف المجال لأربعة نماذج مختلفة ويخلق مجموعة لإعطاء التنبؤ النهائي. حقق النظام المقترح المركز الأول من بين 75 فريقًا شاركوا في المهام الفرعية المذكورة أعلاه. لقد تفوقنا على النموذج الأساسي بهوامش تتراوح من 49.2٪ إلى 76.4٪ ، وبالتالي ، فإننا ندفع بأحدث التقنيات إلى حد كبير.', 'pt': 'O artigo descreve o sistema de melhor desempenho para as subtarefas Afeto nos Tweets (inglês) do SemEval-2018. O sistema se concentra na classificação ordinal e nas subtarefas de regressão para valência e emoção. Para a classificação ordinal, a valência é classificada em 7 classes diferentes, variando de -3 a 3, enquanto a emoção é classificada em 4 classes diferentes, de 0 a 3, separadamente para cada emoção, ou seja, raiva, medo, alegria e tristeza. As subtarefas de regressão estimam a intensidade de valência e cada emoção. O sistema realiza a adaptação de domínio de 4 modelos diferentes e cria um ensemble para dar a previsão final. O sistema proposto alcançou a 1ª posição entre 75 equipas que participaram nas sub-tarefas mencionadas. Superamos o modelo de linha de base por margens que variam de 49,2% a 76,4%, portanto, impulsionando significativamente o estado da arte.', 'fr': "L'article décrit le système le plus performant pour les sous-tâches Affect in Tweets de SEMEval-2018 (anglais). Le système se concentre sur les sous-tâches de classification ordinale et de régression pour la valence et l'émotion. Pour la classification ordinale, la valence est classée en 7 classes différentes allant de -3 à 3 alors que l'émotion est classée en 4 classes différentes (0 à 3) pour chaque émotion, à savoir la colère, la peur, la joie et la tristesse. Les sous-tâches de régression estiment l'intensité de la valence et chaque émotion. Le système effectue une adaptation de domaine de 4 modèles différents et crée un ensemble pour donner la prédiction finale. Le système proposé a obtenu la 1ère position sur 75 équipes qui ont participé aux sous-tâches mentionnées ci-dessus. Nous surpassons le modèle de référence par des marges allant de 49,2\xa0% à 76,4\xa0%, ce qui nous permet de faire progresser la technologie de manière significative.", 'es': 'El documento describe el sistema con mejor rendimiento para las subtareas Efecto en Tweets (inglés) de SemeVal-2018. El sistema se centra en las subtareas de clasificación ordinal y regresión para la valencia y la emoción. Para la clasificación ordinal, la valencia se clasifica en 7 clases diferentes que van de -3 a 3, mientras que la emoción se clasifica en 4 clases diferentes de 0 a 3 por separado para cada emoción, a saber, enfado, miedo, alegría y tristeza. Las subtareas de regresión estiman la intensidad de la valencia y cada emoción. El sistema realiza la adaptación de dominio de 4 modelos diferentes y crea un conjunto para dar la predicción final. El sistema propuesto alcanzó la primera posición de los 75 equipos que participaron en las subtareas antes mencionadas. Superamos al modelo de referencia en márgenes que van del 49,2% al 76,4%, impulsando así el estado de la técnica de manera significativa.', 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval -2018 Affect in Tweets （英語）サブタスクのための最高のパフォーマンスのシステムについて説明しています。このシステムは、原子価と感情の順序分類と回帰サブタスクに焦点を当てています。順序分類では、価は-3から3までの7つの異なるクラスに分類され、感情は怒り、恐怖、喜び、悲しみという感情ごとに別々に4つの異なるクラス0から3に分類されます。回帰サブタスクは、価と各感情の強度を推定します。システムは、4つの異なるモデルのドメイン適応を実行し、最終的な予測を与えるためのアンサンブルを作成します。提案されたシステムは、前述のサブタスクに参加した75チームのうち1位を達成しました。当社はベースラインモデルを49.2 ％から76.4 ％のマージンで上回り、最先端を大きく押し上げています。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2018推文(英语)子务最佳。 统侧重于价情序数类归子职。 其于序数之类,效价分为7异,自-3至3,而情分4异类0至于3,各针其情,则怒而恐惧,喜且悲。 归子计效价强度每情。 系统对 4 异体而域自适,创一融以终其占。 议者统于子职者75小组第一。 吾利润率自49.2%至76.4%不等,优于基线形,而大推先进之术。', 'hi': 'पेपर Tweets (अंग्रेजी) उप-कार्यों में SemEval-2018 प्रभाव के लिए सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है। सिस्टम वैलेंस और भावनाओं के लिए क्रमसूचक वर्गीकरण और प्रतिगमन उप-कार्यों पर केंद्रित है। क्रमसूचक वर्गीकरण के लिए वैलेंस को -3 से 3 तक के 7 अलग-अलग वर्गों में वर्गीकृत किया गया है जबकि भावना को प्रत्येक भावना अर्थात् क्रोध, भय, खुशी और उदासी के लिए अलग-अलग 4 अलग-अलग वर्गों 0 से 3 में वर्गीकृत किया गया है। प्रतिगमन उप-कार्य वैलेंस और प्रत्येक भावना की तीव्रता का अनुमान लगाते हैं। सिस्टम 4 अलग-अलग मॉडलों का डोमेन अनुकूलन करता है और अंतिम भविष्यवाणी देने के लिए एक पहनावा बनाता है। प्रस्तावित प्रणाली ने 75 टीमों में से पहला स्थान हासिल किया, जिन्होंने पूर्व-उल्लिखित उप-कार्यों में भाग लिया। हम 49.2% से 76.4% तक के मार्जिन से बेसलाइन मॉडल को पछाड़ते हैं, इस प्रकार, अत्याधुनिक को महत्वपूर्ण रूप से धक्का देते हैं।', 'ru': 'В документе описывается наиболее эффективная система для подзадач SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets(на английском языке). Система фокусируется на подзадачах ординарной классификации и регрессии для валентности и эмоций. Для упорядоченной классификации валентность классифицируется на 7 различных классов в диапазоне от -3 до 3, тогда как эмоции классифицируются на 4 различных класса от 0 до 3 отдельно для каждой эмоции, а именно гнев, страх, радость и печаль. Подзадачи регрессии оценивают интенсивность валентности и каждой эмоции. Система выполняет адаптацию домена из 4 различных моделей и создает ансамбль, чтобы дать окончательный прогноз. Предлагаемая система достигла 1-го места из 75 команд, которые участвовали в вышеупомянутых подзадачах. Мы опережаем базовую модель по марже в диапазоне от 49,2% до 76,4%, тем самым значительно раздвигая современный уровень.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar cur síos ar an gcóras feidhmíochta is fearr d’fho-thascanna SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets(English). Díríonn an córas ar na fo-thascanna aicmithe agus aischéimnithe ordúil le haghaidh valence agus mothúcháin. Maidir le haicmiú ordúil déantar valence a rangú i 7 n-aicme dhifriúla ó -3 go 3 agus déantar an mhothúchán a rangú i 4 aicme dhifriúla 0 go 3 ar leithligh do gach mothúchán, eadhon fearg, eagla, áthas agus brón. Déanann na fo-thascanna cúlchéimnithe déine na valence agus gach mothúchán a mheas. Déanann an córas oiriúnú fearainn de 4 mhúnla dhifriúla agus cruthaíonn sé ensemble chun an tuar deiridh a thabhairt. Bhain an córas molta an 1ú áit amach as 75 fhoireann a ghlac páirt sna fo-thascanna réamhluaite. Is fearr linn an tsamhail bhunlíne le corrlaigh idir 49.2% agus 76.4%, rud a bhrúnn an stát nua go suntasach.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 Affect Tweets (angol) alprogramok legjobb teljesítményű rendszerét. A rendszer a valencia és az érzelem rendes osztályozására és regressziójára összpontosít. A rendeleti osztályozásban a valencia 7 különböző osztályba sorolható, a -3 és a 3 között, míg az érzelmek 4 különböző osztályba sorolhatók, 0 és 3 között minden érzelem esetében, nevezetesen a harag, a félelem, az öröm és a szomorúság. A regressziós részfeladatok becsülik a valencia intenzitását és az egyes érzelmeket. A rendszer 4 különböző modell domain adaptációját hajtja végre, és együtteset hoz létre a végső előrejelzés megadására. A javasolt rendszer első pozíciót ért el a fent említett alcsoportokban részt vevő 75 csapatból. 49,2%-tól 76,4%-ig terjedő margókkal túlléptük a kiindulási modellt, így jelentősen erőltetve a korszerűséget.', 'el': 'Η εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα καλύτερης απόδοσης για τις επιμέρους εργασίες σε Τουίτετ (Αγγλικά). Το σύστημα επικεντρώνεται στις επιμέρους εργασίες ταξινόμησης και παλινδρόμησης για την τιμιότητα και το συναίσθημα. Για την κανονική ταξινόμηση η valence ταξινομείται σε επτά διαφορετικές κατηγορίες που κυμαίνονται από -3 έως 3 ενώ το συναίσθημα ταξινομείται σε τέσσερις διαφορετικές κατηγορίες 0 έως 3 ξεχωριστά για κάθε συναίσθημα δηλαδή θυμός, φόβος, χαρά και θλίψη. Οι υπο-εργασίες παλινδρόμησης εκτιμούν την ένταση της Βαλένθια και κάθε συναίσθημα. Το σύστημα εκτελεί προσαρμογή τομέων τεσσάρων διαφορετικών μοντέλων και δημιουργεί ένα σύνολο για να δώσει την τελική πρόβλεψη. Το προτεινόμενο σύστημα πέτυχε την πρώτη θέση από τις 75 ομάδες που συμμετείχαν στα προαναφερθέντα υποκαθήκοντα. Υπερτερούμε το μοντέλο βάσης κατά περιθώρια που κυμαίνονται από 49,2% έως 76,4%, ωθώντας έτσι σημαντικά την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας.', 'ka': 'დაახლოები გამოსახულებს SemEval-2018-ის საკუთარი საკუთარი სამუშაო სისტემა. სისტემა განვალენცია და ემოციებისთვის კლასიფიკაციას და რეგრესის სუბრამეტური საქმედებზე დაყენება. ორგანლიური კლასიფიკაციის გავალენტისთვის კლასიფიკაცია 7 განსხვავებული კლასიში -3-3 განსხვავებულია, მაგრამ ემოცია კლასიფიკაცია 4 განსხვავებული კლასიში 0-3 განსხვავებულია ყოველ ემოციებისთვის, რომელიც წ რეგრესის საკუთარი სამუშაო დავამწონეთ გავალენტის და ყოველ ემოციების ინტენსიტი. სისტემა 4 განსხვავებული მოდელების დიომინის ადაპტიფიკაციას გავაკეთება და შექმნა დასაწყისი წინასწორება. პროგრამეტული სისტემა 75 ჯგუფიდან 1-სპოზაციას მიიღეთ, რომლებიც წინასწორედ ამოხსნა სამუშაო სამუშაო დავასწავლეთ. ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ბაზილური მოდელს 49,2%-დან 76,4%-დან, ამიტომ მნიშვნელოვანად წარმოდგენით წარმოდგენით.', 'kk': 'Қағаз жарым- 2018 жарым- шегіндегі tweets( ағылшын) ішкі тапсырмалардың ең жақсы орындау жүйесін таңдайды. Жүйе бағдарлама және емоциялық үшін ординативті классификациялау мен регрессиялық ішкі тапсырмаларына назар аударады. Ординалды классификациялық көлемі 7 түрлі класса - 3- ден 3- ге аударылады, бірақ емоциялық көлемі - 0- 3 түрлі класса, әрбір емоциялық емоциялық көлемі, қорқыныш, бақыныш және қауіпсіздік ү Регрессия ішкі тапсырмалардың көпшілігін және әрбір емоциялардың көпшілігін бағалады. Жүйе 4 түрлі моделдерді доменге адаптациялау және соңғы таңдау үшін сұлбаны құрады. Келтірілген жүйе 75 бағдарламалардан бір-бірінші орналасуын жетті. Біз негізгі үлгілерді 49,2% дегеннен 76,4% дегенге шектеп жатқан, сондықтан әртүрлі орындау үлгісін көмектеседі.', 'lt': 'Dokumente apibūdinama geriausių rezultatų sistema, taikoma „Poveikis dviejuose“ (anglų kalba) posėdžiuose „SemEval-2018“. Sistemoje daugiausia dėmesio skiriama įprastiniam klasifikavimui ir regresijos pogrupiams valencijos ir emocijos atžvilgiu. Įprastojo klasifikavimo valia klasifikuojama į 7 skirtingas klases nuo -3 iki 3, o emocijos klasifikuojamos į 4 skirtingas klases nuo 0 iki 3 atskirai kiekvienai emocijai, būtent pyktis, baimė, džiaugsmas ir liūdnas. Regresijos subužduotys įvertina valencijos intensyvumą ir kiekvieną emociją. Sistema atlieka 4 skirtingų modelių pritaikymą domenui ir sukuria komplektą galutinei prognozei pateikti. Siūloma sistema pasiekė pirmąją poziciją iš 75 komandų, kurios dalyvavo pirmiau minėtuose poskirsniuose uždaviniuose. Pradinio modelio rezultatai yra didesni už 49,2–76,4 % skirtumus, taigi gerokai didinami.', 'it': "L'articolo descrive il sistema più performante per il SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets (English) sotto-task. Il sistema si concentra sui sottocompiti di classificazione ordinale e regressione per valenza ed emozione. Per la classificazione ordinale la valenza è classificata in 7 classi diverse che vanno da -3 a 3 mentre l'emozione è classificata in 4 classi diverse da 0 a 3 separatamente per ogni emozione: rabbia, paura, gioia e tristezza. I sottocompiti di regressione stimano l'intensità della valenza e ogni emozione. Il sistema esegue l'adattamento del dominio di 4 diversi modelli e crea un insieme per dare la previsione finale. Il sistema proposto ha raggiunto la prima posizione su 75 squadre che hanno partecipato ai sottocompiti summenzionati. Superiamo il modello di base con margini che vanno dal 49,2% al 76,4%, spingendo in modo significativo lo stato dell'arte.", 'mk': 'Во весникот се опишува најдобриот систем за најдобри резултати за SemEval- 2018 Affect во Tweets( англиски) подзадачи. Системот се фокусира на ординалната класификација и регресиските подзадачи за валенција и емоции. За рединалната класификација валенцијата е класификувана во 7 различни класи кои се движат од -3 до 3 додека емоциите се класификувани во 4 различни класи 0 до 3 одделно за секоја емоција, а тоа е лутина, стравот, радоста и тагата. Регресиските подзадачи ја проценуваат интензитетот на валенцијата и секоја емоција. Системот спроведува адаптација на домените на 4 различни модели и создава ансембл за да даде конечна предвидба. Предложениот систем постигна прва позиција од 75 тимови кои учествуваа во наведените подзадачи. Ние го надминуваме основниот модел со маргини од 49,2 отсто до 76,4 отсто, така што значително ја притиснуваме најновата технологија.', 'ms': 'Kertas menggambarkan sistem prestasi terbaik untuk SemEval-2018 Affect dalam sub-tugas Tweets(English). Sistem fokus pada klasifikasi ordinal dan subtugas regresi untuk valensi dan emosi. Untuk kelas peringkat valensi diklasifikasikan ke 7 kelas yang berbeza berlainan dari -3 hingga 3 sementara emosi diklasifikasikan ke 4 kelas yang berbeza 0 hingga 3 secara terpisah untuk setiap emosi iaitu kemarahan, ketakutan, kegembiraan dan kesedihan. Subtugas regresi menghargai intensiti valensi dan setiap emosi. Sistem melakukan penyesuaian domain 4 model berbeza dan mencipta kumpulan untuk memberikan ramalan akhir. Sistem yang diusulkan mencapai kedudukan pertama daripada 75 pasukan yang berpartisipasi dalam sub-tugas yang disebut dahulu. Kita melebihi model dasar dengan margin yang berlainan dari 49.2% hingga 76.4%, jadi, mendorong keadaan terbaik secara signifikan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രകടന സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സാധാരണ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനും വികാരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി സബ് ജോലികളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്ലാസുകളിലേക്ക് 7 വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്ലാസുകളിലേക്ക് വിഭാഗിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായി വി പുനരുത്തരത്തിന്\u200dറെ സബ് ജോലികളുടെ ഉയര്\u200dച്ചയും ഓരോ വികാരത്തിന്\u200dറെയും ഉയര്\u200dച്ചയും കണക്കാക്കുന്നു. സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നാലു വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലുകളുടെ ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ആഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവസാന പ്രവച പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച സിസ്റ്റം 75 ടീമില്\u200d നിന്ന് ആദ്യത്തെ സ്ഥാനം പ്രാപിച്ചു. അത് മുന്നോട്ട് പങ്കെടുത്ത സബ്  49.2% മുതല്\u200d 76.4% വരെ മാര്\u200dഗിനുകള്\u200d നാം ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d 49.', 'mt': "Id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tal-aħjar prestazzjoni għas-sottokompiti SemEval-2018 Affett fit-Tweets (Ingliż). Is-sistema tiffoka fuq il-klassifikazzjoni ordinali u s-sottokompiti ta’ rigressjoni għall-valenza u l-emozzjoni. Għall-klassifikazzjoni ordinali l-valenza hija kklassifikata f’7 klassijiet differenti li jvarjaw minn -3 sa 3 filwaqt li l-emozzjoni hija kklassifikata f’4 klassijiet differenti minn 0 sa 3 separatament għal kull emozzjoni, jiġifieri r-rabja, il-biża’, il-pjaċir u l-tristezza. The regression sub-tasks estimate the intensity of valence and each emotion.  Is-sistema twettaq adattament tad-dominju ta’ 4 mudelli differenti u to ħloq ensemble biex tagħti t-tbassir finali. Is-sistema proposta kisbet l-ewwel pożizzjoni minn 75 tim li pparteċipaw fis-sottokompiti msemmija hawn fuq. Aħna nagħmlu prestazzjoni akbar mill-mudell ta' linja bażi b'marġini li jvarjaw minn 49.2% sa 76.4%, u b'hekk nixprunaw l-aktar avvanzati b'mod sinifikanti.", 'mn': 'Харин цаасан нь SemEval-2018 оны Твит(Англи хэлний) суб-даалгаварын хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааны системийг тайлбарладаг. Энэ систем нь зөвхөн сэтгэл хөдлөл болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төлөө төвлөрүүлэх захирамжлал, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төлөө төвлөрүүлдэг. Загварын хэлбэрийн хуваарилалт нь -3-ээс 3-ээс хойш 7 төрлийн ангид хуваарилагддаг. Гэвч сэтгэл хөдлөл нь 0-3 төрлийн ангид 4 төрлийн ангид хуваарилагддаг. Регрессийн суб-даалгавар нь тэнцүү байдал болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчтэй байдлыг тодорхойлдог. Энэ систем 4 өөр загварын зохицуулалт хийдэг бөгөөд хамгийн сүүлийн таамаглал өгөх загвар үүсгэдэг. Өмнөх даалгаварын даалгавар дээр оролцсон 75 багтаас 1-р байрлал гарсан. Бид суурь шугам загварыг 49.2% ээс 76.4% хүртэл гаргаж чадна. Иймээс урлагийн байдлыг маш чухал түвшинд хүргэж чадна.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano najlepiej wydajny system dla podzadań SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets (angielski). System koncentruje się na klasyfikacji ordynalnej i regresji podzadań walencji i emocji. Dla klasyfikacji zwykłej walencja jest klasyfikowana na 7 różne klasy od -3 do 3, natomiast emocje klasyfikowane są na cztery różne klasy 0 do 3 osobno dla każdej emocji, a mianowicie gniew, strach, radość i smutek. Podzadania regresji oszacują intensywność walencji i każdą emocję. System wykonuje adaptację domeny czterech różnych modeli i tworzy zespół, który daje ostateczną przewidywalność. Proponowany system osiągnął pierwszą pozycję spośród 75 zespołów, które uczestniczyły w wyżej wymienionych podzadaniach. Przewyższamy model bazowy o marginesy od 49,2% do 76,4%, tym samym znacząco popychając najnowocześniejszy stan techniki.', 'no': 'Papiret beskriver den beste utføringssystemet for semiEval-2018- effekten i tweets( engelsk) underoppgåver. Systemet fokuserer på den regulære klassifikasjonen og underoppgåva i regresjonen for valens og emosjon. For ordentleg klassifikasjonskvalianse er klassifisert i 7 forskjellige klasser frå -3 til 3 mens følelser er klassifisert i 4 forskjellige klasser 0 til 3 for kvar følelse som er lyd, frykt, glede og trist. Suboppgåvene for regresjon vurderer intensiteten på valens og kvar følelse. Name Førehandsvis systemet oppnådd 1 stposition av 75 grupper som delta i underoppgåva som er førehandsvis. Vi utfører baseline-modellen med marginar frå 49,2 % til 76,4 %, slik at det er viktig å trykke kunsttilstanden.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea descrie cel mai bun sistem de performanță pentru sub-sarcinile SemEval-2018 afect în Tweets (engleză). Sistemul se concentrează pe subsarcinile ordinale de clasificare și regresie pentru valență și emoție. Pentru clasificarea ordinară, valența este clasificată în 7 clase diferite variind de la -3 la 3, în timp ce emoția este clasificată în 4 clase diferite de la 0 la 3 separat pentru fiecare emoție și anume furie, frică, bucurie și tristețe. Subsarcinile de regresie estimează intensitatea valenței și fiecare emoție. Sistemul realizează adaptarea domeniului a 4 modele diferite și creează un ansamblu pentru a oferi predicția finală. Sistemul propus a obţinut prima poziţie din 75 de echipe care au participat la subsarcinile menţionate anterior. Noi depășim modelul de bază cu marje cuprinse între 49,2% și 76,4%, împingând astfel în mod semnificativ nivelul de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'U novinama opisuje najbolji izvršni sistem za polu-Eval-2018 Afekt u podzadatku Tweets(English). Sistem se fokusira na redovnu klasifikaciju i podzadatke regresije za valenciju i emocije. Za normalnu klasifikaciju je klasifikovana u 7 različitih klasa od -3 do 3, dok se emocije klasifikuju na 4 različite klase 0 do 3 odvojeno za svaku emociju, protiv bijesa, straha, radosti i tuge. Podzadatak regresije procjenjuje intenzitet valencije i svake emocije. Sistem obavlja domenu adaptaciju od 4 različitih modela i stvara ensemble za predviđanje konačne predviđanja. Predloženi sistem postigao je 1st položaj od 75 tima koji su sudjelovali u predspomenutim podzadatkima. Izvodimo početni model sa marginama od 49,2% do 76,4%, tako značajno gurajući stanje umjetnosti.', 'sv': 'Uppsatsen beskriver det bästa fungerande systemet för SemEval-2018 Affect i Tweets (engelska) underuppgifter. Systemet fokuserar på de ordinella klassificerings- och regressionsuppgifterna för valens och känslor. För ordinell klassificering klassificeras valens i 7 olika klasser som sträcker sig från -3 till 3 medan känslor klassificeras i 4 olika klasser 0 till 3 separat för varje känsla nämligen ilska, rädsla, glädje och sorg. Regressionsunderuppgifterna uppskattar intensiteten av valens och varje känsla. Systemet utför domänanpassning av 4 olika modeller och skapar en ensemble för att ge den slutliga förutsägelsen. Det föreslagna systemet uppnådde 1:a positionen av 75 team som deltog i de ovannämnda underuppgifterna. Vi överträffar baseline-modellen med marginaler som sträcker sig från 49,2% till 76,4%, vilket ökar den senaste tekniken avsevärt.', 'si': 'සෙම්වෙල් 2018 සබ් වැඩක් සම්ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සම්ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ පද්ධතිය පැහැදිලි කරනවා. පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ භාවිතාවය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය නියෝජිත විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ 7 වෙනස් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වෙනුවෙන් -3 වෙනුවෙන් 3 වෙනුවෙන් වග ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සබ-වැඩක් විශ්වාසය සහ හැම භාවිතාවක්ම අනුමාන කරනවා. පද්ධතිය වෙනස් මොඩල් 4ක් විදිහට සැකසුම් කරනවා ඒ වගේම අන්තිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න සැකසුම් කරනවා. ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු පද්ධතියෙන් 1st ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය ලැබුණා කණ්ඩායම් 75 වලින්. මුලින් කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අපි මූලික ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා 49.2% විතරයි, 76.4% විතරයි, ඉතින්, ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා.', 'so': 'Qoraalka waxaa ku qoran habka ugu wanaagsan ee sameynta ee SemEval-2018 saameyn ku leh Tweets (Ingiriis) hoos-shaqooyinka. Sida caadiga ah nidaamka waxaa ku cusbooneysa fasaxa iyo shaqada hoos-hoos-celinta oo loogu talagalay tababarka iyo iscelinta. Qofka fasalka caadiga ah waxaa loo qeybiyaa 7 fasalka oo kala duduwan oo ka duwan -3-3, isla markaasna hissiga waxaa loo kala qaybsadaa 4 fasalka kala duduwan oo u kala duduwan 0-3 kali ah kasoo ah xanaaq, cabsi, farxad iyo caloolxumo. The regression sub-tasks estimate the intensity of valence and each emotion.  nidaamka wuxuu sameeyaa bedelka bedelka 4 noocyo oo kala duduwan, wuxuuna sameeyaa muusiko si uu ugu dambaysta u sii sheego. nidaamka la soo jeeday wuxuu gaadhay koox 75 ka mid ah, kuwaas oo ka qayb galay shaqada sub-mentioned. Tusaalada asalka ee asalka lagu soo bandhigi karo qaybaha ay ka soo wareegto 49.2% ilaa 76.4%, sidaas darteed si muhiim ah ayay u tuuraan xaalada farshaxanka.', 'ta': 'The paper describes the best performing system for the SemEval- 2018 impact in the Tweets( English) sub-tasks. இயல்பான வகுப்புகள் மற்றும் திரும்பச் செய்யும் துணை பணிகளின் மீது சார்ந்து கொள்ளும். வழக்கமான வகுப்பு பழக்கத்திற்கு 7 வெவ்வேறு வகுப்புகளில் வகுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது -3 ல் இருந்து 3 வரை வெவ்வேறு வகுப்புகளாகும் ஆனால் உணர்வு 4 வேறு வகுப் துணை துணை பணிகள் தேவையின் உயரத்தை மற்றும் ஒவ்வொரு உணர்வுகளுக்கும் மதிப்பிடுகிறது. கணினி 4 வித்தியாசமான மாதிரிகளின் டொமைன் ஒதுக்கீட்டை செய்கிறது மற்றும் கடைசி முன்னடிவை கொடுக்க ஒரு ஒற The proposed system achieved 1stposition out of 75 teams which participated in the fore-mentioned sub-tasks.  49.2% லிருந்து 76.4% வரை ஓரங்கள் மூலம் நாம் அடிப்படையான மாதிரி முறைமையை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம், அதனால் முக்கியமான கலைத்தின் நில', 'ur': 'The paper describes the best performing system for the SemEval-2018 Effect in Tweets(English) sub-tasks. سیسٹم تعلق اور احساسات کے لئے عامل کلاسپیٹ اور دوبارہ ریگرس ساب-ٹاکس پر تمرکز کرتا ہے. اورامیل کلاسیفوں کے لئے 7 مختلف کلاس میں تقسیم کئے جاتے ہیں -3 سے 3 سے -3 سے -4 مختلف کلاس میں تقسیم کئے جاتے ہیں -3 سے مختلف ہر احساس کے لئے -غصہ، خوف، خوشی اور غصہ ہے روگرسیش زیب-ٹاکس کے مطابق والنست اور ہر احساس کی تنگی کا مطابق ہے. سیسٹم نے 4 مختلف موڈل کے دامین اضافہ کرتا ہے اور آخری پیش بینی کے لئے ایک انٹامبل پیدا کرتا ہے. پیغمبر کی سیسٹم نے 75 ٹیموں میں سے 1stposition پہنچ لیا جو پہلے مذہب-ٹیموں میں شامل ہوئے۔ ہم بنیاس لین موڈل کو 49.2% سے 76.4% تک فائدہ دیتے ہیں، اسی طرح، آهنت کی حالت کو اثر سے دھوپ دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Qogʻoz Twitterlar( Ingliz) haqida SemEval-2018'ning eng yaxshi ishlash tizimini anglatadi. Name Oddiy darajalashtirish darajasi - 3 dan 3 dan 3 bo'lgan 7 turli darajaga bo'lgan va hissiyotlar har bir xil sinfga 0-3 darajaga ajratilgan va har bir hissiyotga rasm, хавф, хурсанд ва ғамга. Ushbu boshqaruv vazifalari tadbirlik va har bir hissiyotning kuchini qiymatlashadi. Name Tashkilotgan tizim oldin taʼminlovchi sub-vazifalarga qidirilgan 75 guruhdan birinchi joyga erishildi. Biz 49.2% dan 76.4% (7.4%) bilan asl uslubi modelini bajaramiz, shunday qilib, sanat holatini muhim qiladi.", 'vi': 'Tờ báo miêu tả hệ thống thực hiện tốt nhất cho sở thích Tinh hoàn trong nhiệm vụ nằm dạng Tweet (tiếng Anh). Hệ thống tập trung vào các phân loại và phục hồi quy định về độ cao và cảm xúc. Vì mức độ phân loại bình thường được phân loại thành bảy lớp khác nhau, từ-3 tới 3, trong khi cảm xúc được phân loại thành bốn lớp khác nhau 0-3 riêng biệt cho mỗi cảm xúc, là tức giận, sợ hãi, niềm vui và buồn bã. Việc phụ của sự hồi phục ước lượng độ lượng và cảm xúc. Hệ thống này thực hiện việc thích nghi miền của bốn mô hình khác nhau và tạo ra một dàn nhạc để đưa ra dự đoán cuối cùng. Hệ thống được đề xuất đã đạt được vị trí thứ nhất của đa đội đa chủng đã tham gia các chi nhánh được đề cập. Chúng ta vượt quá mức mô hình cơ bản theo một khoảng cách từ 42=-2) tới Thank.4, vì vậy, thúc đẩy đáng kể trạng thái nghệ thuật.', 'bg': 'Статията описва най-добре представящата се система за подзадачите "Афект в туитове" (английски). Системата се фокусира върху подзадачите за класификация и регресия за валентност и емоция. За нормалната класификация валентността се класифицира в 7 различни класа, вариращи от -3 до 3, докато емоцията се класифицира в 4 различни класа 0 до 3 отделно за всяка емоция, а именно гняв, страх, радост и тъга. Регресивните подзадачи оценяват интензивността на валентността и всяка емоция. Системата извършва домейнна адаптация на 4 различни модела и създава ансамбъл, който дава окончателното прогнозиране. Предложената система постигна 1 позиция от 75 отбора, участвали в горепосочените подзадачи. Ние превъзхождаме базовия модел с маржове, вариращи от 49,2% до 76,4%, като по този начин стимулираме значително съвременните технологии.', 'da': 'Artiklen beskriver det bedst ydende system til SemEval-2018 Affect i Tweets (engelsk) underopgaver. Systemet fokuserer på de ordinære klassifikations- og regressionsopgaver for valens og følelse. For ordinær klassificering klassificeres valens i 7 forskellige klasser, der spænder fra -3 til 3, mens følelser klassificeres i 4 forskellige klasser 0 til 3 separat for hver følelse nemlig vrede, frygt, glæde og sorg. Regressionsunderopgaverne estimerer intensiteten af valens og hver følelse. Systemet udfører domænetilpasning af 4 forskellige modeller og skaber et ensemble til at give den endelige forudsigelse. Det foreslåede system opnåede 1. stilling ud af 75 hold, der deltog i de ovennævnte underopgaver. Vi overgår baseline modellen med marginer, der spænder fra 49,2% til 76,4%, hvilket presser den nyeste teknologi markant.', 'de': 'Der Beitrag beschreibt das am besten performante System für die SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets(Englisch) Teilaufgaben. Das System konzentriert sich auf die ordinalen Klassifikations- und Regressions-Teilaufgaben für Valenz und Emotion. Für die ordinale Klassifizierung wird Valenz in sieben verschiedene Klassen eingeteilt, die von -3 bis 3 reichen, während Emotion in vier verschiedene Klassen 0 bis 3 getrennt für jede Emotion eingeteilt wird, nämlich Wut, Angst, Freude und Traurigkeit. Die Regressions-Teilaufgaben schätzen die Intensität der Valenz und jede Emotion. Das System führt Domänenanpassung von vier verschiedenen Modellen durch und erstellt ein Ensemble, um die endgültige Vorhersage zu geben. Das vorgeschlagene System erreichte die erste Position von 75 Teams, die an den oben genannten Teilaufgaben teilnahmen. Wir übertreffen das Basismodell um Margen von 49,2% bis 76,4%, was den Stand der Technik deutlich vorantreibt.', 'nl': 'De paper beschrijft het best presterende systeem voor de SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets (Engels) subtaken. Het systeem richt zich op de ordinale classificatie en regressie subtaken voor valentie en emotie. Voor ordinale classificatie wordt valentie ingedeeld in zeven verschillende klassen variërend van -3 tot 3, terwijl emotie wordt ingedeeld in vier verschillende klassen 0 tot 3 afzonderlijk voor elke emotie te weten woede, angst, vreugde en verdriet. De regressie sub-taken schatten de intensiteit van valentie en elke emotie. Het systeem voert domeinaanpassing uit van vier verschillende modellen en creëert een ensemble om de definitieve voorspelling te geven. Het voorgestelde systeem bereikte de eerste plaats van 75 teams die aan de bovengenoemde deeltaken deelnamen. We presteren beter dan het basismodel met marges variërend van 49,2% tot 76,4%, waardoor de state-of-the-art aanzienlijk wordt verhoogd.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-2018이 트윗(영어) 하위 임무에 영향을 미친 가장 좋은 표현 시스템을 묘사한다.이 시스템은 배가와 정서의 순서 분류와 회귀 서브 임무에 중심을 두고 있다.질서 분류에 있어 효가는 7개의 다른 종류로 나뉘는데 범위는 -3에서 3까지이고 정서는 4개의 다른 종류인 0에서 3으로 나뉘어 각각 분노, 공포, 즐거움과 슬픔을 겨냥한다.회귀자 임무는 효가와 모든 정서의 강도를 평가한다.이 시스템은 4개의 서로 다른 모델에 대해 역적응을 하고 최종 예측을 위한 집합을 만든다.상기 하위 임무에 참여한 75개 팀 중 제안된 시스템은 1개의 직위를 얻었다.우리의 이윤율은 49.2%에서 76.4%까지 같지 않아 기준모델을 초과하여 선진 수준을 현저하게 추진했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ بهترین سیستم اجرای نیمه\u200cای برای تاثیر نیمه\u200cی سال ۲۰۱۸ در نیمه\u200cهای توئیت(انگلیسی) توصیف می\u200cکند. سیستم روی classification and regression sub-tasks for valence and emotion تمرکز می\u200cکند. در حالی که احساسات به چهار کلاس متفاوت 0 تا 3 مختلف برای هر احساسات، یعنی خشم، ترس، شادی و غمگین، مختلف مختلف است. عمليات زير تغيير تخمين شدت والانترين و هر احساسي را ارزيابي مي کند. سیستم تغییرات دومینی از چهار مدل مختلف انجام می دهد و برای تغییر نهایی انتظار می دهد یک ابزار ایجاد می کند. این سیستم پیشنهاد از ۷۵ تیم\u200cها ۱ موقعیت رسید که در زیر وظیفه\u200cهای پیش\u200cگفته شرکت کردند. ما مدل پایین را با محدودیت 49.2% تا 76.4% انجام می دهیم، بنابراین به طور کلی فشار موقعیت هنر را فشار می دهیم.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linaelezea mfumo bora wa kufanya kazi kwa ajili ya SemEval-2018 Matukio ya Twita (Kiingereza) katika kazi za subira. Mfumo huu unajikita kwenye utaratibu wa kawaida na jukumu la kudhalilishwa kwa upendeleo na hisia. Kwa usawa wa kawaida umegawanywa katika darasa 7 tofauti tofauti kutoka -3 hadi 3 wakati hisia zinagawanyika katika darasa nne tofauti 0 hadi 3 kwa kila hisia kama hasira, khofu, furaha na huzuni. Kazi za kudhibiti zinakadiria kuongezeka kwa ukatili na kila hisia. Mfumo unafanya mabadiliko ya mifano 4 tofauti na kutengeneza mfumo wa kutoa utabiri wa mwisho. Mfumo huu ulipendekezwa ulipata nafasi ya kwanza kutoka timu 75 ambazo ilishiriki katika kazi zilizotajwa mbele. Tunafanya mifano ya msingi kwa viwanja vinavyotokana na asilimia 49.2 hadi asilimia 76.4, kwa hiyo tunasukuma hali ya sanaa kwa kiasi kikubwa.', 'id': 'Kertas menggambarkan sistem prestasi terbaik untuk SemEval-2018 Affect dalam sub-tugas Tweets(Inggris). Sistem fokus pada klasifikasi ordinal dan regresi sub-tugas untuk valensi dan emosi. For ordinal classification valence is classified into 7 different classes ranging from -3 to 3 whereas emotion is classified into 4 different classes 0 to 3 separately for each emotion namely anger, fear, joy and sadness.  Subtugas regresi memperkirakan intensitas valensi dan setiap emosi. Sistem melakukan adaptasi domain dari 4 model yang berbeda dan menciptakan ensemble untuk memberikan prediksi akhir. Sistem yang diusulkan mencapai posisi pertama dari 75 tim yang berpartisipasi dalam sub-tugas yang disebutkan sebelumnya. Kita melebihi model dasar dengan margin dari 49,2% sampai 76,4%, jadi, mendorong state-of-the-art dengan signifikan.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval-2018 Aft üçin iň gowy etjek sistemasyny tweets(English) sub-tasklerinde tassyýar. Sistem derejeli klasifikasyýa we regressiýa jugulary bilen duýgyş bilen fokuslanýar. Adatça klasifikasiýat ýagdaýynda 7 dürli klaslara -3 we 3-den bäri däldir. Duýgyş hem 4 dürli klaslara 0 we 3-de her duýgyş üçin aýratyn ýaly gaharlyk, gorky, begenik we gaharlyk bilen üns berilýär. Regresiýa alt zadalary valensiýasynyň we her duýgynyň ýiglygyny çaklaýar. Sistem 4 farklı modellerinin domeny adaptasyonu gerçekleýär we son tahmin etmek üçin bir köşe yaratır. Mazmunlar sistemada 75 topardan 1-nji posisiýa berildi. Biz esasy çyzgylyň nusgyny 49.2% we 76.4% aralygyna görä çykýarys, şonuň üçin sungatyň durumyny örän möhüm şekilde süýseýäris.', 'sq': 'Gazeta përshkruan sistemin më të mirë performues për SemEval-2018 Affect në nëndetyrat e Tweets(anglisht). Sistemi përqëndrohet në klasifikimin ordinal dhe nëndetyrat e regresionit për valencën dhe emocionin. Për klasifikimin ordinal valenca klasifikohet në 7 klasa të ndryshme që shkojnë nga -3 deri në 3 ndërsa emocionet klasifikohen në 4 klasa të ndryshme 0 deri në 3 veçanërisht për çdo emocion, në të vërtetë zemërim, frikë, gëzim dhe trishtim. Subdetyrat e regresionit vlerësojnë intensitetin e valencës dhe çdo emocion. Sistemi kryen përshtatje në domeni të 4 modeleve të ndryshëm dhe krijon një komplet për të dhënë parashikimin përfundimtar. Sistemi i propozuar arriti pozitën e parë nga 75 ekipe që morën pjesë në nëndetyrat e përmendura më parë. Ne e tejkalojmë modelin bazë me marxhe që shkojnë nga 49.2% në 76.4%, kështu që shtyjmë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme state-of-the-art.', 'af': "Die papier beskryf die beste uitvoerde stelsel vir die SemEval- 2018 Affect in Tweets( Engels) sub- tasks. Die stelsel fokus op die ordeel klassifikasie en regresie sub-taak vir valensie en emosie. Vir ordenale klasifikasie valensie is klassifiseer in 7 verskillende klasse af -3 tot 3 terwyl emosie in 4 verskillende klasse 0 tot 3 geskei is vir elke emosie, naamlik toorn, vrees, vreugde en bedroef. Die regresie sub-taak bereken die intensiteit van valensie en elke emosie. Die stelsel uitvoer domein aanpassing van 4 verskillende modele en skep 'n ensembleem om die eindelike voorskou te gee. Die voorgestelde stelsel het 1stposisie van 75 teams bereik wat gedeel het in die voorgementioneerde subtaak. Ons uitvoer die basisline model deur grense van 49,2 % tot 76,4 %, sodat die staat van die kuns betekeurig gedruk het.", 'am': 'የጋዜጠው ጉዳዩ የSemEval-2018 ትዊተሮች (እንግሊዘኛ) ደብዳቤዎችን የሚጠቅመውን የድምፅ ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ የስርዓቱ ትምህርት እና ስብሰባን ለመቀናቀል እና ማሰናከል ደብዳቤ ስራዎችን ማጠቃለያል፡፡ የአሁኑን ክፍል ግንኙነት ከ3 ጀምሮ እስከ 3 ተለይቶ ወደ 7 ልዩ ደረጃዎች ተለያይቶአል፡፡ አካባቢው አካባቢ ስራዎችን የውጤት ውጤት እና የሁሉንም እውቀት ይቆጥራል፡፡ ሲስተም 4 የተለየ ዓይነቶች አካባቢ አካባቢ ያደርጋል፡፡ በተገኘው ስርዓት የፊተኛውን ደብዳቤ-ስራዎችን ተካፈሉ ከ75 ቡድን መጀመሪያ ስፍራን አግኝቷል፡፡ ከ49.2 በመቶ ወደ 76.4 በመቶን የሚቆጠሩ መደገፊያውን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին նկարագրում է ամենալավ արդյունավետ համակարգը, որը կատարվում է 2018 թվիթերի (անգլերեն) ենթախնդիրներում: Համակարգը կենտրոնանում է վալենցիայի և զգացմունքների սովորական դասակարգման և ռեգրեսիայի ենթախնդիրների վրա: For ordinal classification valence is classified into 7 different classes ranging from -3 to 3 whereas emotion is classified into 4 different classes 0 to 3 separately for each emotion namely anger, fear, joy and sadness.  Ռեգրեսիայի ենթախնդիրները գնահատում են վալենցիայի ինտենսիվությունը և յուրաքանչյուր զգացմունք: Համակարգը կատարում է 4 տարբեր մոդելների բնագավառի ադապտացիա և ստեղծում է համակարգ վերջնական կանխատեսման տալու համար: Պատրաստված համակարգը հասավ 75 թիմերից առաջին դիրքը, որոնք մասնակցեցին նախկինում նշված ենթախնդիրներին: Մենք գերազանցում ենք սկզբնական մոդելը 49.2 տոկոսից մինչև 76.4 տոկոսից, ինչը նշանակալի ձգտում է բարձրագույնը:', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ টুইটে (ইংরেজি) সাব কাজের জন্য প্রভাবিত সেরা প্রকাশিত ব্যবস্থার ব্যাখ্যা করেছে। সিস্টেম সাধারণ শ্রেণীকরণ এবং আবেগের জন্য সাব-কাজের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। সাধারণ বিভিন্ন শ্রেণীর ভ্যালেন্স -৩ থেকে ৩ থেকে বিভিন্ন শ্রেণীতে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন শ্রেণীর মধ্যে বিভক্ত হয়েছে এবং অনুভূতি ৪ ভিন্ন শ্রেণ পুনরাবৃত্তির সাব-কাজ হিসেবে প্রত্যেক অনুভূতির শক্তির হিসেবে হিসেব করে। সিস্টেম চারটি ভিন্ন মডেলের ডোমেইন অ্যাড্যাপপটেশন করে এবং শেষ ভবিষ্যৎবাণী দেয়ার জন্য একটি সংকেত তৈরি করে। প্রস্তাবিত সিস্টেম ৭৫টি দলের মধ্যে প্রথম অবস্থান অর্জন করেছে যারা পূর্বে উল্লেখিত সাব-কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে। ৪৯.২% থেকে ৭৬.', 'hr': 'U novinama opisuje najbolji izvršni sustav za poluvjetni-2018 Afekt u podzadatkima Tweets(English). Sistem se fokusira na odgovarajuću klasifikaciju i podzadatke regresije za vrijednost i emocije. Za normalnu klasifikaciju je klasifikirana u 7 različitih klasa od -3 do 3, dok se emocije klasifikiraju na 4 različitih klasa 0 do 3 odvojeno za svaku emociju, protiv bijesa, straha, radosti i tuge. Podzadatak regresije procjenjuje intenzitet valencije i svake emocije. Sistem obavlja adaptaciju domena četiri različite modela i stvara ensemble za predviđanje konačne predviđanja. Predloženi sustav postigao je 1st položaj od 75 timova koji su sudjelovali u predspomenutim podzadatkima. Izviđamo početni model sa marginama od 49,2% do 76,4%, stoga značajno guramo stanje umjetnosti.', 'cs': 'Článek popisuje nejlépe výkonný systém pro podúlohy SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets (anglicky). Systém se zaměřuje na ordinální klasifikaci a regresní dílčí úlohy pro valenci a emoce. Pro ordinální klasifikaci je valence klasifikována do sedmi různých tříd od -3 do 3, zatímco emoce jsou klasifikovány do čtyř různých tříd 0 až 3 zvlášť pro každou emoci, tedy hněv, strach, radost a smutek. Regresní dílčí úkoly odhadují intenzitu valence a každou emoci. Systém provádí doménovou adaptaci čtyř různých modelů a vytváří soubor pro poskytnutí konečné predikce. Navrhovaný systém získal první pozici z 75 týmů, které se podílely na výše uvedených dílčích úkolech. Překonáváme základní model o rozpětí od 49,2% až 76,4%, čímž výrazně posouváme nejmodernější stav techniky.', 'bs': 'U novinama opisuje najbolji izvršni sistem za poluvremeno-2018 Afekt u podzadatku Tweets(English). Sistem se fokusira na pravilnu klasifikaciju i podzadatke regresije za vrijednost i emocije. Za normalnu klasifikaciju je klasifikovana na 7 različitih klasa od -3 do 3, dok se emocije klasifikuju na 4 različitih klasa 0 do 3 odvojeno za svaku emociju, protiv bijesa, straha, radosti i tuge. Podzadatak regresije procjenjuje intenzitet valencije i svake emocije. Sistem obavlja adaptaciju domena od 4 različitih modela i stvara ensemble za predviđanje konačne predviđanja. Predloženi sistem postigao je 1st položaj od 75 tima koji su sudjelovali u predspomenutim podzadatkima. Izvodimo početni model sa marginama od 49,2% do 76,4%, tako značajno gurajući stanje umjetnosti.', 'et': 'Töös kirjeldatakse SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets (inglise keeles) alamülesannete jaoks parimaid tulemusi. Süsteem keskendub valentsi ja emotsiooni ordinaalse klassifitseerimise ja regressiooni alamülesannetele. Ordinaalse klassifikatsiooni puhul klassifitseeritakse valentsus 7 erinevasse klassi vahemikus -3 kuni 3, samas kui emotsioon klassifitseeritakse 4 erinevasse klassi 0 kuni 3 eraldi iga emotsiooni kohta nimelt viha, hirm, rõõm ja kurbus. Regressiooni alamülesanded hindavad valentsuse intensiivsust ja iga emotsiooni. Süsteem viib läbi 4 erineva mudeli domeenikohandamise ja loob lõpliku prognoosi andmiseks ansambli. Kavandatud süsteem saavutas eespool nimetatud alamülesannetes osalenud 75 meeskonnast ühe koha. Me tuleme baasmudelist üle 49,2%-st 76,4%-ni marginaalide, mistõttu jõuame tehnika tasemele märkimisväärselt.', 'ca': "El paper descriu el sistema de millor rendiment de la sub-tasca de SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets(anglès). El sistema es centra en la classificació ordinal i les subtasques de regressió per la valencia i l'emoció. Per la classificació ordinal la valencia es classifica en 7 classes diferents que van de -3 a 3 mentre que l'emoció es classifica en 4 classes diferents de 0 a 3 per separat per cada emoció, a saber ira, por, alegria i tristesa. Les subtasques de regressió estimen la intensitat de la valencia i cada emoció. El sistema fa l'adaptació de dominis de 4 models diferents i crea un conjunt que dóna la predicció final. El sistema proposat va aconseguir la primera posició de cada 75 equips que van participar en les subtasques mencionades. Superem el model de referència amb marxes que van del 49,2% al 76,4%, així que empenyem significativament l'últim.", 'az': 'Kağıt SemEval-2018 üçün Tweets(English) sub-tasklərində ən yaxşı performancı sistemini təsbiq edir. Sistem düzgün klasifikasiya və regresiya hisslərinin altı işlərinə odaqlanır. Ordinal klasifikasiya müəyyən edilməsi üçün 7 fərqli sınıf -3 ilə 3-dən ayırılır. Halbuki duygular hər hissənin öfkəsi, qorxu, sevinc və kədərlənməsi üçün 4 fərqli sınıf 0-3 ilə ayırılır. Reqresiyanın altı işləri valencinin və hər hissinin ağırlığını təmin edir. Sistem 4 müxtəlif modellərin dəyişikliyini və son tədbir vermək üçün bir ensembli yaradır. Önüllü sistem 75 dəstədən birinci pozisyonu qəbul etdi ki, əvvəlcə belə danışmış alt-işlərdə iştirak etdilər. Biz sətir modelini 49,2%-dən 76,4%-ə qədər uzaqlaşdırırıq. Beləliklə, sanatın vəziyyəti mövcuddur.', 'fi': 'Työssä kuvataan parhaiten suoriutuvaa järjestelmää SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets(English) -alatehtäviin. Järjestelmä keskittyy ordinaaliluokitus- ja regressiotehtäviin valenssin ja tunteiden osalta. Ordinaaliluokituksessa valenssi luokitellaan seitsemään luokkaan -3-3, kun taas tunne luokitellaan neljään luokkaan 0-3 erikseen kullekin tunteelle eli viha, pelko, ilo ja suru. Regression alitehtävissä arvioidaan valdenssin voimakkuutta ja kunkin tunteen voimakkuutta. Järjestelmä toteuttaa neljän eri mallin verkkotunnuksen mukauttamisen ja luo kokonaisuuden, joka antaa lopullisen ennusteen. Ehdotettu järjestelmä saavutti 1. sijan 75 tiimistä, jotka osallistuivat edellä mainittuihin alatehtäviin. Suoritamme perusmallin marginaaleilla 49,2–76,4%, mikä nostaa huipputasoa merkittävästi.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing rambarang pancen sing paling nggawe sistem sing luwih nggawe seminval-2008 AfEffect nang tatag-tanggal Tuts(Inggris). Sistem kang dipoles gambaran karo perusahaan karo Nguasar Awak dhéwé Ngucap The System plays domain modification of 4 new modes and Creates an ensembedle to Give the last preview. Sistem sing dipoleh nggawe 1stposition nang 75 kepengin sing wis dipoleh nang dadi apat-task sing diranggawe Awakdhéwé nggawe model sing paling-iki dipunangé, ditambah 49.2% sampek 75.4%, lan daoleh-itimbang barang-karang ngendalikno.', 'he': 'העיתון מתאר את מערכת ההופעה הטובה ביותר עבור השפעה SemEval-2018 בתפקידים התחתוניים של טוויטס (אנגלית). המערכת מתמקדת בהסדרה המיוחדת והתחת משימות הגדרה לאולנסיות ורגשות. עבור שיעור מסווג מיוחד מסווג לתוך 7 כיסות שונות מתרחבות מ -3 עד 3 בעוד רגשות מסווגים לתוך 4 כיסות שונות 0 עד 3 בנפרד לכל רגש, כלומר כעס, פחד, שמחה ועצב. התפקידים הקטנים מעריכים את האינטנסיבות של ואלנס וכל רגש. המערכת מבצעת התאמה לתחום של 4 דוגמנים שונים ויוצרת אסמבל כדי לתת את החזוי הסופי. The proposed system achieved 1stposition out of 75 teams which participated in the fore-mentioned sub-tasks.  אנו מעלים את הדוגמא הבסיסית על ידי שווים שמגיעים מ-49.2% ל-76.4%, ולכן, דוחפים את המצב המיוחד באופן משמעותי.', 'ha': "Gansa na bayyana mafi kyaun fassarar na kasar da Semeval-2018 Affect in Sub-taskõkin Twitter(Ingiriya). @ action: button Ana rarraba rabin darajõji na dabam'a 7 dabam-dabam na tsakanin -3 zuwa 3, kuma an rarraba hisia cikin darafõfi 4 dabam-dabam, 0 zuwa 3 dabam-dabam ga kõwane hisãbi kamar fushi, tsõro, fari da baƙin ciki. Mai bincike-aikin da aka ƙaddara ƙaranci na fani da kowace hisãbi. @ info: whatsthis Ga'anar da aka sake shi, ya isa matsayin farko daga jama'a saba'a wanda suka yi shirin cikin aikin da aka taɓa wa zaman-taɓa. Za tafiyar da misalin salon da ke tsakanin 49.2 zuwa 76.4%, don haka, za'a goge halin-the-art mai girma.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan najboljši sistem za podnaloge SemEval-2018 Affect in Tweets (angleščina). Sistem se osredotoča na redno klasifikacijo in regresijo podnalog za valentnost in čustva. Za redno klasifikacijo je valjenca razvrščena v 7 različnih razredov od -3 do 3, medtem ko je čustva razvrščena v 4 različne razrede 0 do 3 ločeno za vsako čustvo in sicer jeza, strah, radost in žalost. Regresijske podnaloge ocenjujejo intenzivnost valence in vsako čustvo. Sistem izvaja domensko prilagoditev štirih različnih modelov in ustvari ansambel, ki daje končno napoved. Predlagani sistem je dosegel 1. mesto od 75 ekip, ki so sodelovale pri omenjenih podnalogah. Izhodiščni model presegamo z maržami, ki se gibljejo od 49,2% do 76,4%, s čimer znatno pritisnemo na najsodobnejše.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval-2018་ཡི་ཨ་ཕིའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ངལ་རིམ་པ་གཤིས་ཀྱི་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་དོན་ཚན་ཤོག་ཡིན། མ་ལག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་བསུབ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ལ་མཐུན་པ་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་མཚོན་ན། དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་དབྱེ་བ་ཡིན། དབུལ་བསྡུས་ལས་ཀ་གནད་དོན་དག་གིས་མཐུན་སྒོ་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་མཚུངས་ཡོད། The system performs domain adaptation of 4 different models and creates an ensemble to give the final prediction. གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་གནད་དོན་ལྔོན་གྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་མཐོ་ཚད་༡༥ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་49.2% དར་76.4% ཡིན་པའི་རྨང་གཞི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་ནས་ཕར་ཆེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ar': 'مهمة SemEval 2018 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية بلغات متعددة', 'pt': 'Tarefa 2 do SemEval 2018: previsão de emojis multilíngues', 'fr': 'SemEval 2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Prédiction multilingue des emoji', 'es': 'Tarea 2 de SemEval 2018: Predicción multilingüe de emoji', 'ja': 'SemEval 2018タスク2 ：多言語絵文字予測', 'hi': 'Semeval 2018 कार्य 2: बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'Задача 2 SemEval 2018: Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи', 'zh': 'SemEval 2018 务2:多言表情符号占', 'ga': 'Tasc 2 SemEval 2018: Tuar Emoji Ilteangach', 'ka': 'SemEval 2018 რაოდენობა 2: მრავალური ემოჯიის წინაწერება', 'hu': 'SemEval 2018 feladat 2: többnyelvű emoji jóslás', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη εμόζι', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілді эмози тапсырмасы 2018 жылы 2- тапсырма', 'lt': '2018 m. pusmetis vertinimas 2 užduotis: daugiakalbė Emoji prognozė', 'mk': 'SemEval 2018 задача 2: Мултијазична прогноза за емои', 'it': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ms': 'SemEval 2018 Tugas 2: Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: പല ഭാഷ എമോജി മുന്\u200dഗണനം', 'mt': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'mn': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'no': 'Semeval 2018 Oppgåve 2: Multispråk emoji- forhåndsvising', 'pl': 'SemEval 2018 Zadanie 2: Wielojęzyczne prognozy Emoji', 'ro': 'SemEval 2018 Sarcina 2: Predicția emoțiilor multilingve', 'si': 'සෙම්වේල් 2018 කාර්ය 2: ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධානය', 'so': 'SemEval 2018 Shaqada 2: Heeganka luuqadaha badan ee Emoji', 'sr': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'sv': 'SemEval 2018 Uppgift 2: Flerspråkig Emoji Prediction', 'ta': 'SemEval 2018 பணி 2: பல மொழி எமோஜி முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'uz': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'vi': 'Ý tưởng phát ngôn của Emoji', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Многоезична прогноза за емоджи', 'da': 'SemEval 2018 Opgave 2: Flersproget Emoji Forudsigelse', 'hr': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'id': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'nl': 'SemEval 2018 Taak 2: Meertalige Emoji Voorspelling', 'de': 'SemEval 2018 Aufgabe 2: Mehrsprachige Emoji Vorhersage', 'fa': 'عملیات ۲۰۱۸: پیشنهاد Emoji Multilingual', 'ko': 'SemEval 2018 미션 2: 다국어 이모티콘 예측', 'sw': 'SemEval 2018 Kazi 2: Utawala wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji', 'tr': 'SemEval 2018 Görev 2: Çoklu dilli Emoji Öfkesi', 'sq': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'am': 'ስምEval 2018 ስራ 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'hy': '2018 թվականի կիսագնդի 2. հանձնարարությունը. բազմալեզու էմոյի կանխատեսումը', 'az': 'SemEval 2018 Görev 2: Çoxlu Dilli Emoji Özünü', 'af': 'SemEval 2018 Taak 2: Multilingual Emoji Voorskou', 'bn': 'SemEval 2018 কাজ ২: বহুভাষী এমোজি প্রেকশন', 'cs': 'SemEval 2018 Úkol 2: Vícejazyčná předpověď emoji', 'ca': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'et': 'SemEval 2018 ülesanne 2: mitmekeelne emoji prognoos', 'bs': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'fi': 'SemEval 2018 Tehtävä 2: Monikielinen Emoji Ennuste', 'jv': 'seminval 2008 task 2: Multilanguage emuji', 'ha': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'sk': 'SemEval 2018 Naloga 2: Večjezična napoved emojijev', 'he': 'SemEval 2018 משימה 2: Prediction Emoji Multilingual', 'bo': 'SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the results of the first Shared Task on Multilingual Emoji Prediction, organized as part of SemEval 2018. Given the text of a tweet, the task consists of predicting the most likely emoji to be used along such tweet. Two subtasks were proposed, one for English and one for Spanish, and participants were allowed to submit a system run to one or both subtasks. In total, 49 teams participated to the English subtask and 22 teams submitted a system run to the Spanish subtask. Evaluation was carried out emoji-wise, and the final ranking was based on macro F-Score. Data and further information about this task can be found at.https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344.\n    ', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نتائج المهمة المشتركة الأولى حول توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات ، والتي تم تنظيمها كجزء من SemEval 2018. بالنظر إلى نص تغريدة ، تتكون المهمة من توقع الرموز التعبيرية الأكثر احتمالية لاستخدامها مع هذه التغريدة. تم اقتراح مهمتين فرعيتين ، واحدة للغة الإنجليزية والأخرى للإسبانية ، وتم السماح للمشاركين بإرسال نظام تشغيل إلى مهمة فرعية واحدة أو كلاهما. في المجموع ، شارك 49 فريقًا في المهمة الفرعية باللغة الإنجليزية وقدم 22 فريقًا نظام تشغيل للمهمة الفرعية الإسبانية. تم إجراء التقييم من منظور الرموز التعبيرية ، واستند الترتيب النهائي إلى درجة F الكلية. يمكن العثور على البيانات والمزيد من المعلومات حول هذه المهمة على <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344>.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve os resultados da primeira Tarefa Compartilhada de Previsão de Emojis Multilíngues, organizada como parte do SemEval 2018. Dado o texto de um tweet, a tarefa consiste em prever o emoji mais provável a ser usado ao longo desse tweet. Duas subtarefas foram propostas, uma para inglês e outra para espanhol, e os participantes foram autorizados a enviar uma execução do sistema para uma ou ambas as subtarefas. No total, 49 equipes participaram da subtarefa em inglês e 22 equipes submeteram uma execução do sistema à subtarefa em espanhol. A avaliação foi realizada em termos de emojis e a classificação final foi baseada no macro F-Score. Dados e mais informações sobre esta tarefa podem ser encontrados em <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344>.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe los resultados de la primera tarea compartida sobre predicción multilingüe de emojis, organizada como parte de SemEval 2018. Dado el texto de un tweet, la tarea consiste en predecir el emoji más probable que se utilizará en dicho tweet. Se propusieron dos subtareas, una para inglés y otra para español, y se permitió a los participantes enviar una ejecución del sistema a una o ambas subtareas. En total, 49 equipos participaron en la subtarea en inglés y 22 equipos enviaron una ejecución del sistema a la subtarea en español. La evaluación se llevó a cabo en forma de emojis, y la clasificación final se basó en la macro F-Score. Puede encontrar datos e información adicional sobre esta tarea en < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit les résultats de la première tâche partagée sur la prédiction multilingue des emoji, organisée dans le cadre de SemEval 2018. Compte tenu du texte d'un tweet, la tâche consiste à prédire l'émoji le plus susceptible d'être utilisé avec ce tweet. Deux sous-tâches ont été proposées, une pour l'anglais et l'autre pour l'espagnol, et les participants ont été autorisés à soumettre une exécution système pour l'une ou les deux sous-tâches. Au total, 49 équipes ont participé à la sous-tâche en anglais et 22 équipes ont soumis une exécution système à la sous-tâche espagnole. L'évaluation a été effectuée par émoji, et le classement final a été basé sur le macro F-Score. Vous trouverez des données et des informations supplémentaires sur cette tâche à l'adresse < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.", 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval 2018の一部として組織された多言語絵文字予測に関する最初の共有タスクの結果について説明します。ツイートのテキストを考えると、タスクは、そのようなツイートに沿って使用される可能性が最も高い絵文字を予測することからなる。英語とスペイン語の2つのサブタスクが提案され、参加者は1つまたは両方のサブタスクにシステム実行を提出することができました。合計49チームが英語のサブタスクに参加し、22チームがスペイン語のサブタスクにシステム実行を提出した。評価は絵文字で行われ、最終ランキングはマクロFスコアに基づいていた。このタスクに関するデータと詳細情報は、を参照してください<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344>。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval 2018之多言表情符号占首共功也。 给定推文之文本,其占最可推表情符号。 举二子,一以英语,一以西班牙语,许参与者以一二子任。 凡49团队与英语子,22团队与西班牙语子行。 评估以表情符号行之,终列名于宏观F-Score。 其数益多信息,请访<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344>。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी पर पहले साझा कार्य के परिणामों का वर्णन करता है, जो SemEval 2018 के हिस्से के रूप में आयोजित किया गया है। एक ट्वीट के पाठ को देखते हुए, कार्य में इस तरह के ट्वीट के साथ उपयोग किए जाने वाले सबसे संभावित इमोजी की भविष्यवाणी करना शामिल है। दो उप-कार्यों का प्रस्ताव किया गया था, एक अंग्रेजी के लिए और एक स्पेनिश के लिए, और प्रतिभागियों को एक या दोनों उप-कार्यों के लिए एक सिस्टम रन प्रस्तुत करने की अनुमति दी गई थी। कुल मिलाकर, 49 टीमों ने अंग्रेजी सबटास्क में भाग लिया और 22 टीमों ने स्पेनिश सबटास्क में एक सिस्टम रन प्रस्तुत किया। मूल्यांकन इमोजी-वार किया गया था, और अंतिम रैंकिंग मैक्रो एफ-स्कोर पर आधारित थी। इस कार्य के बारे में डेटा और अधिक जानकारी <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344> पर पाई जा सकती है।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе описываются результаты первой совместной задачи по многоязычному прогнозированию эмодзи, организованной в рамках SemEval 2018. Учитывая текст твита, задача состоит в том, чтобы предсказать наиболее вероятные эмодзи, которые будут использоваться вместе с таким твитом. Были предложены две подзадачи: одна для английского языка, а другая для испанского языка, и участникам было разрешено представить информацию о работе системы в рамках одной или обеих подзадач. Всего в английской подзадаче участвовало 49 команд, и 22 команды представили системный запуск в испанской подзадаче. Оценка проводилась по эмодзи, а окончательный рейтинг основывался на макро- F-показателе. Данные и дополнительную информацию об этой задаче можно найти по адресу<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344>.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar thorthaí an chéad Tasc Comhroinnte ar Ilteangach Emoji Prediction, a eagraíodh mar chuid de SemEval 2018. I bhfianaise téacs tweet, is éard atá sa tasc ná na emoji is dóichí a úsáidfear feadh tweet den sórt sin a thuar. Moladh dhá fhothasc, ceann amháin don Bhéarla agus ceann don Spáinnis, agus ceadaíodh do rannpháirtithe córas a ritheadh chuig fothasc amháin nó an dá cheann a chur isteach. San iomlán, ghlac 49 foireann páirt i bhfothasc Shasana agus chuir 22 fhoireann córas arna rith chuig an bhfothasc Spáinneach isteach. Rinneadh meastóireacht emoji-wise, agus bhí an rangú deiridh bunaithe ar mhacra-Scór F. Is féidir sonraí agus tuilleadh faisnéise faoin tasc seo a fháil ag <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344>.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერა პირველი გაყოფილი რაოდენობის წარმოდგენები მრავალური ემოგი წარმოდგენისთვის, რომელიც პირველი გაყოფილი რაოდენობაზე, რომელიც ორგანზიზი Tweet-ის ტექსტის შესახებ, რაოდენობა იქნება, რომელიც უფრო შესაძლებელია ამოჯიში გამოიყენება. ჩვენ ანგლისთვის და ერთი სპანელისთვის და სპანელისთვის შესაძლებელია სისტემის გადატანა ერთი ან ორივე სპანელისთვის. საერთოდ 49 ჯგუფი ინგლისური საკითხისთვის დაწყვეტილი და 22 ჯგუფი სპეციალური საკითხისთვის სპეციალური საკითხისთვის დაწყვეტილი სისტემა. ემოჯიში გავამუშავებულია, და ბოლო რენჯიცია მაკრო F-სკორეზე იყო. მონაცემები და დამატებული ინფორმაცია ამ დავალების შესახებ < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 - ეა.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τα αποτελέσματα της πρώτης Κοινής Εργασίας για την Πολυγλωσσική Πρόγνωση Εμότζι, που διοργανώθηκε στο πλαίσιο της SemEval 2018. Δεδομένου του κειμένου ενός tweet, το καθήκον συνίσταται στην πρόβλεψη του πιο πιθανό emoji που θα χρησιμοποιηθεί κατά μήκος αυτού του tweet. Προτάθηκαν δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες, μία για τα αγγλικά και μία για τα ισπανικά, και οι συμμετέχοντες είχαν τη δυνατότητα να υποβάλουν ένα σύστημα εκτέλεσης σε μία ή και τις δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Συνολικά, 49 ομάδες συμμετείχαν στην αγγλική υποταγή και 22 ομάδες υπέβαλαν ένα σύστημα στην ισπανική υποταγή. Η αξιολόγηση διεξήχθη με βάση τα εμόζι και η τελική κατάταξη βασίστηκε στη μακροεντολή Φ-Score. Δεδομένα και περισσότερες πληροφορίες σχετικά με αυτή την εργασία μπορείτε να βρείτε στο < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 keretében megrendezett első megosztott feladat többnyelvű emoji előrejelzéssel kapcsolatos eredményeit. Tekintettel a tweet szövegére, a feladat az, hogy megjósolja az ilyen tweet mellett használandó legvalószínűbb emoji-t. Két részfeladatot javasoltak, egyet angolul és egyet spanyolul, és a résztvevők engedélyezték, hogy egy vagy mindkét részfeladathoz küldjenek be egy rendszer futtatását. Összesen 49 csapat vett részt az angol részfeladatban és 22 csapat nyújtott be egy rendszerfuttatást a spanyol részfeladathoz. Az értékelés emoji szempontból történt, a végső rangsorolás pedig makro F-pontszámon alapult. A feladatról szóló adatok és további információk a < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive i risultati del primo Task Condiviso sulla Predizione Emoji Multilingue, organizzato nell'ambito di SemEval 2018. Dato il testo di un tweet, il compito consiste nel prevedere le emoji più probabili da utilizzare lungo tale tweet. Sono state proposte due sottoattività, una per l'inglese e una per lo spagnolo, e ai partecipanti è stato permesso di inviare un sistema eseguito a una o entrambe le sottoattività. In totale, 49 squadre hanno partecipato alla sottomissione inglese e 22 squadre hanno presentato un sistema eseguito alla sottomissione spagnola. La valutazione è stata effettuata dal punto di vista emoji, e la classifica finale è stata basata su macro F-Score. I dati e ulteriori informazioni su questa attività sono disponibili su < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomi pirmosios bendros užduoties dėl daugiakalbių emojų prognozių rezultatai, organizuojamos kaip 2018 m. SemEval dalis. Given the text of a tweet, the task consists of predicting the most likely emoji to be used along such tweet.  Buvo pasiūlyti du paklausimai, vienas anglų kalba ir vienas ispanų kalba, o dalyviams buvo leista pateikti sistemą, vykdomą vienam ar abiem paklausymams. Iš viso 49 komandos dalyvavo anglų paklausoje ir 22 komandos pateikė sistemą, skirtą Ispanijos paklausai. Vertinimas buvo atliktas pagal emocijas, o galutinis vertinimas buvo grindžiamas makrofunkciniu rezultatu. Duomenys ir papildoma informacija apie šią užduotį pateikiami < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ги опишува резултатите од првата заедничка задача за мултијазичната емоџиска предвидба, организирана како дел од SemEval 2018 година. Со оглед на текстот на твитот, задачата се состои од предвидување на најверојатните емоџи кои ќе се користат на ваквиот твит. Беа предложени два потпрашања, едно за англиски и едно за шпански, а учесниците беа дозволени да поднесат систем кој ќе биде спроведен на едно или двете потпрашања. Вкупно, 49 тимови учествуваа на англиските подпрашања и 22 тимови поднесоа систем на шпански подпрашања. Евалуацијата беше спроведена по емоџи, а последното рангирање беше базирано на макро Ф-резултат. Податоци и понатамошни информации за оваа задача се наоѓаат на < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың бірінші ортақтастырылған тапсырманың нәтижелерін бірнеше тілдік эмози бағдарламасының бірінші ортақтастырылған тапсырманы таңдайды. Твиттердің мәтіні көрсеткенде, тапсырма бұл tweet және қолданылатын эмоджтердің көмегімен алдын алады. Екі ішкі сұрақ ұсынылды, бірі ағылшын тілінде және бірі испан тілінде және қатысушыларға жүйені бір не екі ішкі сұраққа жіберу рұқсат етілді. Жалпы 49 команда ағылшын тілінің суретіне қатысу және 22 команда Испания суретіне жұмыс істеді. Эмоджи жүйесінде оқу жасалды, соңғы жолдар макро F- нүктесіне негізделген. Бұл тапсырма туралы деректер мен қосымша мәлімет < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan keputusan Tugas Berkongsi pertama tentang Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa, yang diatur sebagai sebahagian dari SemEval 2018. Mengingat teks tweet, tugas terdiri daripada meramalkan emoji yang paling mungkin digunakan sepanjang tweet tersebut. Two subtasks were proposed, one for English and one for Spanish, and participants were allowed to submit a system run to one or both subtasks.  Dalam jumlah, 49 pasukan berpartisipasi ke subtask Inggeris dan 22 pasukan menghantar sistem berjalan ke subtask Spanyol. Penghargaan dilakukan secara emoji-wise, dan peringkat terakhir berdasarkan makro-skor F. Data dan maklumat lanjut mengenai tugas ini boleh ditemui di < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi r-riżultati tal-ewwel Kompitu Konġunt dwar it-Tbassir Emoji Multilingwi, organizzat bħala parti mis-SemEval 2018. Minħabba t-test ta’ tweet, il-kompitu jikkonsisti fit-tbassir tal-emoji l-aktar probabbli li għandhom jintużaw matul tali tweet. Ġew proposti żewġ sottomistoqsijiet, waħda għall-Ingliż u waħda għall-Ispanjol, u l-parteċipanti setgħu jissottomettu sistema li taħdem għal sottomistoqsijiet waħda jew iż-żewġ. B’kollox, 49 tim ipparteċipaw fis-sottotalba Ingliża u 22 tim ippreżentaw sistema mmexxija għas-sottotalba Spanjola. Evaluation was carried out emoji-wise, and the final ranking was based on macro F-Score.  Dejta u aktar informazzjoni dwar dan il-kompitu jinstabu fuq < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ജോലിയുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018-ല്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഗമായി സംഘടി ഒരു ടൂട്ടിയുടെ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് കൊണ്ട്, ഈ ടൂട്ടില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഏറ്റവും സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഇമോജിയെ പ്രവചിക്കുന്നത്  രണ്ടു സബ്ജീസുകള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കപ്പെട്ടു. ഒന്ന് ഇംഗ്ലീഷിനും ഒന്ന് സ്പാനിഷിനും വേണ്ടി, പങ്കുകാര്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു സിസ്റ്റ മൊത്തം 49 ടീമുകള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് സബ്ബട്ട് ചെയ്തതില്\u200d പങ്കാളികളായിരുന്നു. 22 ടീമുകള്\u200d സ്പാനിഷ് സബ്ബട്ടിലേക് എമോജി ബുദ്ധിമാനായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടു. അവസാന റാങ്കിങ് മാക്രോ എഫ്-സ്കോര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഈ ജോലിയെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള ഡേറ്റാവും കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളും ലഭ്യമല്ല < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2018 оны SemEval-ын нэг хэсэг болж зохион байгуулсан олон хэлний Эмози хэлний анхны хуваалтын ажлын үр дүнг тайлбарладаг. Твиттийн текст учраас, ажил нь ийм tweet дээр хэрэглэгдэх хамгийн магадлалтай эможийг таамаглах юм. Хоёр сурагчид нэг нь Англи, нэг нь Испанийн хувьд, оролцогчдын хувьд нэг эсвэл хоёр сурагчид системийг суулгах боломжтой болсон. 49 баг Англи хэлний сурагчид оролцсон бөгөөд 22 баг Испанийн сурагчид сурагчид оролцсон. Эмоджийн хувьд дүгнэлт хийгдсэн бөгөөд сүүлийн дүгнэлт нь Макро F-Score-ын үндсэн. Энэ ажлын тухай мэдээлэл болон нэмэлт мэдээлэл < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver resultatet av den første delte oppgåva om fleirspråk emoji- forordning, organiserte som del av semiEval 2018. Gjennomsiktig teksten på ei tweet er oppgåva med å forventa den mest sannsynlege emoji som skal brukast langs slike tweet. To underspørsmål vart foreslått, ein for engelsk og ein for spansk, og deltakarar vart tillatt å senda eit systemkøyring til ein eller både underspørsmål. I tillegg har 49 grupper delta på underspørjingane i engelsk, og 22 grupper sendt eit systemkøyring til den spanske underspørjinga. Evalueringa vart utført med emoji, og det siste rekninga vart basert på makro F-poeng. Data og meir informasjon om denne oppgåva kan finnast på < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje wyniki pierwszego wspólnego zadania dotyczącego prognozowania emoji wielojęzycznych, zorganizowanego w ramach SemEval 2018. Biorąc pod uwagę tekst tweeta, zadanie polega na przewidywaniu najbardziej prawdopodobnych emoji, które będą użyte wzdłuż takiego tweeta. Zaproponowano dwa podzadania, jeden dla angielskiego i jeden dla hiszpańskiego, a uczestnicy mogli zgłosić system uruchomiony do jednego lub obu podzadań. W sumie 49 zespoły uczestniczyły w podzadaniu angielskim, a 22 zespoły przesłały bieg systemowy do podzadania hiszpańskiego. Ocena została przeprowadzona emoji, a ostateczny ranking oparty był na makro F-Score. Dane i dalsze informacje na temat tego zadania można znaleźć pod adresem < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie rezultatele primei activități partajate privind predicția emoji multilingvă, organizată în cadrul SemEval 2018. Având în vedere textul unui tweet, sarcina constă în a prezice cel mai probabil emoji care va fi folosit de-a lungul unui astfel de tweet. Au fost propuse două subactivități, una pentru engleză și una pentru spaniolă, iar participanților li s-a permis să trimită un sistem rulat la una sau ambele subactivități. În total, 49 de echipe au participat la subactivitatea engleză și 22 de echipe au trimis un sistem rulat la subactivitatea spaniolă. Evaluarea a fost efectuată emoji-înțelept, iar clasamentul final a fost bazat pe macro F-Score. Date și informații suplimentare despre această activitate pot fi găsite la < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලොකු භාෂාභාෂික එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධානයක් ගැන පළමු සම්බන්ධ වැඩේ ව ට්විට් එකේ පාළුවක් තියෙන්නේ, වැඩේ තමයි මේ වගේ ට්විට් එක්ක භාවිත වෙන්න පුළුවන් එමෝජි වලින් ප්\u200d ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වුනා, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් සඳහා එකක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් එකක්  සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, කණ්ඩායම් 49 කණ්ඩායම් ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් සහ කණ්ඩායම් 22 කණ්ඩායම් ස් මැක්රෝ F-ස්කෝර් එකේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා තියෙනවා. මේ වැඩ ගැන දත්ත සහ තව තොරතුරු හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje rezultate prvog zajedničkog zadatka o višejezičkoj Emoji predviđanju, organizovanog kao deo semiEvala 2018. S obzirom na tekst tweet a, zadatak se sastoji od predviđanja najverovatnije emoji koji će biti korišteni u takvom tweetu. Predloženo je dve podrške, jedan za engleski i jedan za španjolski, a sudionici su dozvoljeni da podnese sistem koji se upravlja jednom ili obe podrške. Ukupno, 49 timova sudjelovalo su u engleskom podpitanju i 22 timova podnelo je sistem koji je vodio španjolskom podpitanju. Evaluacija je provedena na emoji, a poslednji red je baziran na makro F-Score. Podaci i daljnje informacije o ovom zadatku se nalaze na < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay resultinta shaqada ugu horeeyay ee la sharciyey oo ku qoran luqada badan ee Emoji Prediction, oo loo qabanqaabiyey qayb ka mid ah SemEval 2018. Markii la siiyo qoraalka tweetka, shaqadu wuxuu ka mid yahay mid la sii sheegayo waxa ugu suurtowda in la isticmaalo emoji oo kale. Waxaa la soo jeeday laba shuqul, mid Ingiriis u qoran, mid Isbanish, kuwa ka qayb galana waxaa la ogolaaday in lagu soo diro nidaam mid ama labada shaqooyin. Dhammaan 49 koox ayaa ka qayb galay shabakadda Ingiriiska iyo 22 koox oo u soo dhiibay nidaamka hoosta Isbanish. Qiimeynta waxaa la sameeyay xigmad leh emoji, dhamaadkuna wuxuu ku saleysay macro F-Score. Macluumaad dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan shaqadaas waxaad ka heleysaa < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver resultaten av den första Shared Task on Flerspråkig Emoji Prediction, organiserad som en del av SemEval 2018. Med tanke på texten i en tweet består uppgiften i att förutsäga den mest sannolika emoji som ska användas längs en sådan tweet. Två deluppgifter föreslogs, en för engelska och en för spanska, och deltagarna fick skicka in en systemkörning till en eller båda deluppgifterna. Totalt deltog 49 lag i den engelska underuppgiften och 22 lag skickade in en systemkörning till den spanska underuppgiften. Utvärderingen gjordes emoji-mässigt, och den slutliga rankningen baserades på makro F-Score. Data och ytterligare information om denna uppgift finns på < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தின் முதல் பகிர்ந்த பணியின் முடிவுகளை விளக்குகிறது SemEval 2018ன் பகுதியாக அமைக்கப்பட்ட பல மொழிகள் எமோயி முன்னே ஒரு சுட்டியின் உரையை கொடுத்தால், இந்த செயல் மிகவும் சிறந்த உணர்ச்சியின் மூலம் பயன்படுத்தப்பட வேண்டிய உணர்ச்சி என Two subtasks were proposed, one for English and one for Spanish, and participants were allowed to submit a system run to one or both subtasks.  மொத்தமாக, 49 குழுக்கள் ஆங்கிலத்தின் துணை பணிக்கு பகிர்ந்தனர் மற்றும் 22 குழுக்கள் ஸ்பானிஷ் துணை பணிக்கு இயக Evaluation was performed by emoji wise, and the final ranking was based on macro F- score. இந்த செயல் பற்றிய தகவல் மற்றும் மேலும் தகவல் < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ نے بہت سی زبان ایموجی کی پیشنهاد کی پہلی شریک ٹاکس کی نتائج بیان کی ہے، جو نصف ایولی 2018 کی حصہ میں سازما ہوئی ہے. ایک ٹویٹ کے پیغام کے ذریعہ، یہ کام اس طرح کے ٹویٹ کے ساتھ استعمال کیے جانے کے زیادہ احتمالاً emoji کی پیش آنے سے ہے. ایک انگلیسی کے لئے اور ایک اسپانیایی کے لئے، اور شرکت کرنے والوں کو ایک یا دونوں سٹم پر چلنے کی اجازت دی گئی تھی. 49 ٹیموں نے انگلیسی سپٹ پرس میں مشارک کیا اور 22 ٹیموں نے اسپانیایی سپٹ پرس کے لئے سیسٹم ڈال دیا۔ اِموجی طریقے سے ارزیابی کی گئی تھی، اور آخری رقم مکرو F-Score پر بنیاد تھی. اس کام کے بارے میں ڈاٹا اور اضافہ معلومات <at> https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >', 'uz': 'Бу саҳифа SemEval 2018 тарзда ташкил қилинган кўп tillar Emoji Predictionary (Multilingua Emoji) birinchi qismi natijalarini anglatadi. Twitterdan matn bilan, vazifa shunday foydalanish uchun eng yaxshi emoji ishlatiladigan deb hisoblash mumkin. Two subtasks were proposed, one for English and one for Spanish, and participants were allowed to submit a system run to one or both subtasks.  Umumiy, 49 guruhi ingliz tilidagi sub-vazifaga qayta ishlatilgan va 22 guruhga Ispanchaga ishga tushirilgan tizimga kiritilgan. Taʼrifi emoji xigmasi bajarildi va oxirgi chegara macro F- scorga asosida yaratildi. Ushbu vazifa haqida maʼlumot va qoʻshimcha maʼlumot topilmadi <da https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả kết quả của "Tập đoàn chia sẻ" đầu tiên về dự đoán đa ngôn ngữ Emoji, được tổ chức như một phần của SemEvol. Dựa theo chữ viết của tweet, nhiệm vụ là dự đoán những biểu tượng có thể được sử dụng trên Twitter. Hai yêu cầu phụ đề xuất, một cho tiếng Anh và một cho tiếng Tây Ban Nha, và người tham gia được phép gửi một hệ thống chạy theo một hoặc cả hai mặt phụ đề. Tổng thể, đội 42 đã tham gia các đội quân Anh Quốc và quân 22N đã gửi một chạy hệ thống tới lãnh địa Tây Ban Nha. Bài đánh giá được thực hiện một cách biểu cảm, và bài đánh giá cuối cùng được dựa trên nền F-Score. Dữ liệu và thêm thông tin về nhiệm vụ này có thể tìm thấy ở https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 -̀.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de resultaten van de eerste Shared Task on Multilingual Emoji Prediction, georganiseerd als onderdeel van SemEval 2018. Gezien de tekst van een tweet bestaat de taak uit het voorspellen van de meest waarschijnlijke emoji die tijdens een dergelijke tweet zal worden gebruikt. Er werden twee subtaken voorgesteld, één voor Engels en één voor Spaans, en deelnemers mochten een systeemrun indienen bij één of beide subtaken. In totaal namen 49 teams deel aan de Engelse subtaak en 22 teams stuurden een systeemrun naar de Spaanse subtaak. De evaluatie werd emoji-achtig uitgevoerd en de uiteindelijke ranking was gebaseerd op macro F-Score. Gegevens en verdere informatie over deze taak vindt u op < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва резултатите от първата споделена задача за многоезично прогнозиране на емоджи, организирана като част от СемЕвал 2018. Предвид текста на туит, задачата се състои в предсказване на най-вероятното емоджи да се използва заедно с такъв туит. Бяха предложени две подзадачи, една за английски и една за испански, и участниците имаха право да представят система за изпълнение на една или и двете подзадачи. Общо 49 отбора участваха в английската подзадача, а 22 отбора подадоха система на испанската подзадача. Оценката беше извършена с емоджи, а окончателното класиране беше базирано на макрос F-Score. Данни и допълнителна информация за тази задача можете да намерите на < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver resultaterne af den første delte opgave om flersproget emoji forudsigelse, organiseret som en del af SemEval 2018. I betragtning af teksten i en tweet består opgaven i at forudsige den mest sandsynlige emoji, der skal bruges sammen med en sådan tweet. Der blev foreslået to underopgaver, en til engelsk og en til spansk, og deltagerne fik lov til at indsende et system kørt til en eller begge underopgaver. I alt deltog 49 hold i den engelske underopgave og 22 hold indsendte en systemkørsel til den spanske underopgave. Evalueringen blev udført emoji-vis, og den endelige placering var baseret på makro F-Score. Data og yderligere oplysninger om denne opgave findes på < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje rezultate prvog zajedničkog zadatka o višejezičkoj Emoji predviđanju, organiziranog kao dio semiEvala 2018. S obzirom na tekst tweet a, zadatak se sastoji od predviđanja najvjerojatnijih emoji koji će se koristiti uz takvu tweet. Predloženo je dvije podrške, jedan za engleski i jedan za španjolski, a sudionici su dozvoljeni da podnese sustav koji se vodi na jedan ili oba podrška. Ukupno, 49 timova sudjelovalo su u engleskom podpitanju i 22 timova podnio je sustav koji je vodio španjolskom podpitanju. Evaluacija je provedena na emoji, a konačna reda je bazirana na makro F-Score. Podaci i daljnje informacije o ovom zadatku se nalaze na < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die Ergebnisse der ersten Shared Task on Multilingual Emoji Prediction, organisiert im Rahmen von SemEval 2018. Angesichts des Textes eines Tweets besteht die Aufgabe darin, vorherzusagen, welches Emoji am wahrscheinlichsten entlang eines solchen Tweets verwendet wird. Es wurden zwei Teilaufgaben vorgeschlagen, eine für Englisch und eine für Spanisch, und die Teilnehmer konnten einen Systemlauf für einen oder beide Teilaufgaben einreichen. Insgesamt nahmen 49-Teams an der englischen Teilaufgabe teil und 22-Teams übermittelten einen Systemlauf an die spanische Teilaufgabe. Die Auswertung erfolgte emotional und das finale Ranking basierte auf dem Makro F-Score. Daten und weitere Informationen zu dieser Aufgabe finden Sie unter < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan hasil dari Tugas Berkongsi pertama tentang Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa Berbahasa, terorganisir sebagai bagian dari SemEval 2018. Mengingat teks dari tweet, tugas terdiri dari memprediksi emoji yang paling mungkin digunakan sepanjang tweet tersebut. Two subtasks were proposed, one for English and one for Spanish, and participants were allowed to submit a system run to one or both subtasks.  Dalam total, 49 tim berpartisipasi untuk subtask Inggris dan 22 tim mengirimkan sistem menjalankan untuk subtask Spanyol. Evaluasi dilakukan secara emoji-wise, dan peringkat akhir berdasarkan makro-F-Score. Data dan informasi lanjut tentang tugas ini dapat ditemukan di < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'ko': '본고는 SemEval 2018의 일부로 조직된 첫 번째 다국어 표정 예측 공유 임무의 결과를 묘사한다.추문의 텍스트를 지정합니다. 이 추문에서 가장 사용할 수 있는 이모티콘을 예측하는 작업을 포함합니다.두 개의 하위 임무를 제시했는데 하나는 영어에 사용되고 하나는 스페인어에 사용되며 참가자들은 한 시스템이 하위 임무나 두 개의 하위 임무로 실행되는 것을 제출할 수 있다.총 49개 팀이 영어 하위 임무에 참여했고 22개 팀은 스페인어 하위 임무의 시스템 운영을 제출했다.평가는 이모티콘을 바탕으로 했고 최종 순위는 거시적 F점수를 바탕으로 했다.이 작업에 대한 데이터 및 자세한 내용은 <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344>.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea matokeo ya kazi za kwanza zilizoshirikishwa kwenye Utawala wa Emoji wa lugha nyingi, ulioandaliwa kama sehemu ya SemEval 2018. Given the text of a tweet, the task consists of predicting the most likely emoji to be used along such tweet.  Mipango miwili ilipendekezwa, moja kwa lugha ya Kiingereza na moja kwa Kihispania, na washiriki waliruhusiwa kuutumia mfumo unaoendelea kwa kazi moja au mbili. Kwa ujumla, timu 49 walishiriki katika jukumu la Kiingereza na timu 22 zilitoa mfumo unaoendelea kwenye jukumu la Uhispania. Uchunguzi ulifanyika kwa hisia za akili, na kiwango cha mwisho kilikuwa na msingi wa kiwango cha F-Score. Taarifa na taarifa zaidi kuhusu kazi hii inaweza kupatikana kwenye < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 2018-nji ýylyň SemEval bilen düzenlenen ilkinji Paýlaşy Taýgyzyň netijesini tassyýar. Tweet metini görä, şol zady be ýleki tweet bilen ulanylan emoji täzeliklerini çaklamak üçin däldir. Iki alt sorag teklip edildi, bir iňlisçe we bir iňlisçe, bir iňlisçe we bir iňlisçe we hem iştirakçiler sisteme bir ýa-da iki alt soragyna girmek üçin rugsat berildi. Toplumatda 49 topar Iňlisçe alt soragyna goşuldy we 22 topar Ispanýolça alt soragyna goşuldy. Taýýarlama emoji tarapyndan çykyldy we soňky düzümleme makro F-Skorda daýanýardy. < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >', 'fa': 'این کاغذ نتایج اولین کار مشترک در مورد پیشنهاد اموژی چندین زبان را توصیف می\u200cکند، که به عنوان بخشی از نصف سال ۲۰۱۸ سازمان شده است. با توجه به متن یک توئیت، این کار از پیش بینی کردن احتمال ترین اموجی که در طول این توئیت استفاده می شود وجود دارد. دو سؤال پیشنهاد شد، یکی برای انگلیسی و یکی برای اسپانیایی، و شرکتگران اجازه داده شد که سیستم را به یک یا هر دو سؤال اجازه دهند. جمله 49 تیم به زیر سوال انگلیسی شرکت کردند و 22 تیم سیستم را به زیر سوال اسپانیایی فرستادند. ارزیابی به طریق اموجی انجام شد، و آخرین مرحله بر اساس مکرو F-Score بنیاد گرفته شد. اطلاعات و اطلاعات بیشتری درباره این کار در < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 .', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die resultate van die eerste Gedeelde Opdrag op Multilingual Emoji voorskrif, organiseer as deel van SemEval 2018. Gies die teks van 'n tweet, die taak bestaan van voorskou van die mees waarskynlik emoji te gebruik word langs sodanige tweet. Twee subtaske is voorgestel, een vir Engels en een vir Spaanse, en deelnaders is toegelaat om 'n stelsel hardloop na een of beide subtaske te onderhou. In totaal het 49 teams gedeel by die Engelse ondersoek en 22 teams 'n stelsel hardloop na die Spaanse ondersoek. Evaluasie is uitgevoer emoji-wys, en die eindelike rangering was gebaseer op makro F-Score. Data en verdere inligting oor hierdie taak kan gevind word by < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >", 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ የSemEval 2018 ክፍል የተደረገውን የመጀመሪያውን የተካፈሉት ስራ ውጤቶች ለብዙልቋንቋ ኢዮጂ ፕሬዝዳንት ያሳያል፡፡ በትዊተር ጽሑፎችን በመጠየቅ፣ ስራው እንደዚህ በtweeteት የሚጠቀሙት ምናልባት ኢሞጂን ለመቀበል ነው፡፡ ሁለት ደብዳቤዎችን ለመፈለግ፣ አንዱ ለኢንግሊዘኛ እና አንዱ ለስፓኒሽ እና ተጋሪዎች ለአንድ ወይም ሁለቱ ደብዳቤዎችን ለመስጠት ተፈቅዶአል፡፡ በሙሉ 49 ቡድን ወደ እንግሊዘኛ ደብዳቤ እና 22 ቡድን ወደ ስፓኒሽ ደብዳቤ ሲስተም ሰጥተዋል፡፡ የኢሜጂ ጥበብ እና የኋለኛው ደረጃ ማክሮ F-ነኮር የተደረገ ነው፡፡ ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan rezultatet e detyrës së parë të përbashkët mbi parashikimin e Emoji Shumë-gjuhës, të organizuar si pjesë e SemEval 2018. Duke pasur parasysh tekstin e një tweet, detyra përbëhet nga parashikimi i emoxhit më të gjatë që do të përdoret gjatë një tweet të tillë. U propozuan dy nënpyetje, një për anglishtin dhe një për spanjollin dhe pjesëmarrësit u lejuan të dërgojnë një sistem të drejtuar në një apo të dy nënpyetje. Në total, 49 ekipe morën pjesë në nënpyetjen angleze dhe 22 ekipe paraqitën një sistem të drejtuar në nënpyetjen spanjolle. Vlerësimi u krye në mënyrë emoji dhe renditja përfundimtare u bazua në makro-F-Score. Të dhënat dhe informacione të mëtejshme rreth kësaj detyre mund të gjenden në < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԵվալ" առաջին բազմալեզու էմոյի կանխատեսման հանձնարարության արդյունքները: Given the text of a tweet, the task consists of predicting the most likely emoji to be used along such tweet.  Երկու ենթահարցեր առաջարկեցին, մեկը անգլերենի և մեկը իսպաներենի համար, և մասնակիցներին թույլ տվեց ներկայացնել մի համակարգ, որը կատարվում է մեկ կամ երկու ենթահարցերին: Ընդհանուր առմամբ 49 թիմ մասնակցել էին անգլերենի ենթահարցերին և 22 թիմ ներկայացրել են համակարգ, որը անցնում է իսպաներեն ենթահարցերին: Արժեքը կատարվեց էմոզի առումով, և վերջնական դասակարգը հիմնված էր մակրո F-Սկորի վրա: Տվյալները և այս խնդրի մասին ավելի շատ տեղեկատվություն կարող եք գտնել https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 ]:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা সেমভাল ২০১৮ এর অংশ হিসেবে আয়োজন করা মাল্টিভাষায় প্রথম শেয়ার করা কাজের ফলাফল বর্ণনা করেছে। টুইটের টেক্সট দিয়ে এই কাজের মধ্যে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এরকম টুইটে সবচেয়ে সম্ভাব্য ইমোজি ব্যবহার করা হবে। প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছিল দুটি সাবটাকাজ, একটি ইংরেজী এবং একটি স্প্যানিশের জন্য। অংশগ্রহণকারীদের একটি সিস্টেমে একটি বা উভয় সাবটা সর্বোচ্চ ৪৯ দল ইংরেজী সাবটাবাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে এবং ২২ টি দল স্প্যানিশ সাবক্ষেত্রে একটি সিস্টেম জমা দিয়েছে। ইমোজি জ্ঞানের বিষয়টি মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে এবং শেষ র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং ম্যাক্রো F-স্কোরের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে। Data and further information about this task can be found at < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval olaraq organizasyonlı çoxlu dilli Emoji təsiri barəsindəki ilk paylaşılmış işin sonuçlarını təsbiq edir. Tövidlərin məktubuna görə, bu işin bu twet vasitəsilə istifadə ediləcəyi ən mümkün emoji tədbir edilməsi idi. İki subtaskı təklif edildi, bir İngilizce üçün, bir İspanyolca üçün, və iştirakçıların bir ya da iki subtaskə sistemi təklif etməsinə izin verildi. Toplam 49 takım İngilizə subtask-a katıldı və 22 takım İspanyol subtask-ə sistemi göndərdi. Vəziyyət emoji vasitəsilə təşkil edildi və son dərəcələr makro F-Score vasitəsilə təşkil edildi. Bu işlər barəsində məlumat və daha çox məlumat < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu els resultats de la primera tasca compartida de predicció multilingüe d'emoji, organitzada com part de SemEval 2018. Tenint en compte el text d'un tweet, la tasca consisteix en predir les emoji més probables que s'utilitzen al llarg d'aquests tweets. Es van proposar dues subterrànies, una per anglès i una per espanyol, i els participants es van permetre subministrar un sistema d'execució a una o ambas subterrànies. In total, 49 teams participated to the English subtask and 22 teams submitted a system run to the Spanish subtask.  L'evaluació es va fer en sentit emoji, i la classificació final va basar-se en macro-F-Score. Les dades i més informació sobre aquesta tasca es troben a < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje rezultate prvog zajedničkog zadatka o višejezičkoj Emoji predviđanju, organizovanog u dijelu semiEvala 2018. S obzirom na tekst tweet a, zadatak se sastoji od predviđanja najvjerojatnijih emoji koji će biti korišteni u takvom tweetu. Predloženo je dvije podatke, jedan za engleski i jedan za španjolski, a sudionici su dozvoljeni da podnese sistem pokretan jednom ili oba podatka. Ukupno, 49 timova sudjelovalo su u engleskom podpitanju i 22 timova podnio je sistem koji je vodio španjolskom podpitanju. Evaluacija je provedena na emoji-u, a konačna pozicija je bazirana na makro F-Score. Podaci i daljnje informacije o ovom zadatku se nalaze na < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 - Da.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje výsledky prvního sdíleného úkolu na vícejazyčné předpovědi emoji, organizovaného v rámci SemEvalu 2018. Vzhledem k textu tweetu spočívá úkol v předpovědi nejpravděpodobnějších emoji, které budou použity spolu s takovým tweetem. Byly navrženy dva podúkoly, jeden pro angličtinu a jeden pro španělštinu, a účastníci byli povoleni předložit systémový běh na jeden nebo oba podúkoly. Celkem se 49 týmy zúčastnily anglického podúkolu a 22 týmy předložily systémový běh do španělského podúkolu. Hodnocení bylo provedeno emoji-moudry a konečné hodnocení bylo založeno na makro F-Score. Data a další informace o tomto úkolu naleznete na adrese < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2018 raames korraldatud esimese mitmekeelse emoji prognoosi jagatud ülesande tulemusi. Arvestades säutsu teksti, seisneb ülesanne prognoosida kõige tõenäolisemaid emojisid, mida sellise säutsu koos kasutatakse. Pakuti välja kaks alamülesannet, üks inglise ja teine hispaania jaoks, ning osalejatel lubati esitada süsteemi käivitamine ühele või mõlemale alamülesandele. Kokku osales Inglise alamülesandes 49 meeskonda ja Hispaania alamülesandele 22 meeskonda. Hindamine viidi läbi emojide mõttes ja lõplik järjestus põhines makro F-skooril. Andmed ja lisateave selle ülesande kohta leiate aadressilt < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan ensimmäisen monikielisen emoji-ennusteen jaetun tehtävän tuloksia, joka järjestettiin osana SemEval 2018 -ohjelmaa. Kun otetaan huomioon tweetin teksti, tehtävä koostuu todennäköisimmän emojin ennustamisesta tällaisen tweetin yhteydessä. Esitettiin kaksi alatehtävää, yksi englanniksi ja yksi espanjaksi, ja osallistujat saivat lähettää järjestelmän yhteen tai molempiin alatehtäviin. Englanninkieliseen alatehtävään osallistui 49 joukkuetta ja espanjalaiseen alatehtävään 22 joukkuetta. Arviointi suoritettiin emojitasolla ja lopullinen sijoitus perustui makroon F-Score. Tietoja ja lisätietoja tästä tehtävästä löytyy osoitteesta < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki dipoleh barang panjenengan tanggal nggawe Mbak Samsul Tabah sing sampeyan karo Multilenguang emuji prediksiyon, nggawe ngubah sampeyan karo semebal 2008. Tuning Yuta bener Tambah, 49 sampeyan sing menyang kelas nang bantayan Inggris lan 22 sampeyan sing nambah sistem kanggo nganggo dolanan sing Kasal. Ngucap D https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >', 'ha': "Wannan avir describes the matsalar of the first Shared Tafiyar on multilingulin Emoji Prediction, organized as part of Semeval 2018. Gida matsayin wani na'ura, aikin yana cikin bayani da ake iya amfani da mafiya yiwuwa da za'a yi amfani da shi daga wannan Twitter. An buƙace wa aikin biyu, ɗayan wa Ingiriya da ɗayan wa Isbanish, kuma an yarda musanya wani na'urar da za'a tafiyar da shi zuwa wani ko duk taskõki. Gansa da jumla, 49 jama'a sun yi shirin zuwa sub-aikin Ingiriya da 22 jama'a suka bãyar da wani system wanda ya tafiyar zuwa sub-aikin Isbanish. An cika Canza Mai Hikima da shi, kuma an sami ranar ta ƙarshen shine a kan macro F-score. Ana iya gano data da ƙaranci game da wannan aikin https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >", 'sk': 'V prispevku so opisani rezultati prve skupne naloge o napovedovanju večjezičnih emojijev, organizirane v okviru SemEval 2018. Glede na besedilo tweeta je naloga sestavljena iz napovedovanja najverjetnejših emojijev, ki se bodo uporabljali vzdolž takšnega tweeta. Predlagani sta bili dve podnalogi, eno za angleščino in eno za španščino, udeleženci pa so lahko predložili sistem za eno ali obe podnalogi. V angleški podnalogi je sodelovalo 49 ekip, v španski podnalogi pa je 22 ekip predložilo sistem. Ocena je bila izvedena v smislu emojijev, končna razvrstitev pa je temeljila na makro F-Score. Podatke in dodatne informacije o tem opravilu najdete na < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.', 'he': "העיתון הזה מתאר את התוצאות של המשימה הראשונה המשותפת על תחזוי אמואי רבות שפות, מאורגנת כחלק של SemEval 2018. בהתחשב בטקסט של טוויט, המשימה היא לחזות את האמוג'י הכי סביר שימש לאורך טוויט כזה. שני תושאלות הוצעו, אחת לאנגלית ואחד לספרדית, והמשתתפים הורשו לשלוח מערכת פעילה לאחד או לשני תושאלות. בסך הכל, 49 קבוצות השתתפו לתת השאלה האנגלית ו-22 קבוצות שלחו מערכת לרוץ לתת השאלה הספרדית. הערכה נעשתה מבחינה של אמוג'י, והמערכת הסופית הייתה מבוססת על נקודת מקרו-F. נתונים ומידע נוסף על המשימה הזו נמצאים ב < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >.", 'bo': 'ཤོག དྲ་ཐོག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་དཔེར་ན། བྱ་སྤྱོད་འདིས་དེའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཞིན་པའི་emoji རྣམས་ཟེར་བ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ། ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ། དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་གཅིག་སྒེར་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་གཅིག་དང་། ཞུགས་སྐྱེས་པ་ཚོ་དོ་དམ་གསོག ཡོངས་བསྡུར་ཡོངས་བཞིན་མཁན་49 དབུགས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྡེབ་ཕྲེ་བ་དང་ཚོ་ཕྱི་ཁམས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲུབ་ལ་སྤྱོད དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཡོད་པའི་emoji-wise གནད་དོན་བྱས་པ་དང་། མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་གོ་རིམ་དེ་(F)སྡུད་གཞི་རྟེན་ཏེ། བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་སྐོར་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་གསལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17344 >'}
{'en': 'Tbingen-Oslo at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : SVMs perform better than RNNs in Emoji Prediction', 'ar': 'Tübingen-Oslo في SemEval-2018 Task 2: أداء SVMs أفضل من RNNs في توقع الرموز التعبيرية', 'pt': 'Tübingen-Oslo na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: SVMs têm desempenho melhor que RNNs na previsão de emojis', 'fr': 'Tübingen-Oslo au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: les SVM obtiennent de meilleurs résultats que les RNN dans la prédiction des emoji', 'es': 'Tübingen-Oslo en la Tarea 2 de SemEval-2018: las SVM funcionan mejor que las RNN en la predicción de Emoji', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のテュービンゲン-オスロタスク2 ： SVMは絵文字予測でRNNよりも優れたパフォーマンスを発揮します', 'ru': 'Tübingen-Oslo на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Виртуальные машины защиты работают лучше, чем RNN в прогнозировании эмодзи', 'zh': 'Tübingen-Oslo at SemEval-2018 事2:SVM优于表情符号RNN', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर Tübingen-ओस्लो: SVM इमोजी भविष्यवाणी में RNNs से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं', 'ga': 'Tübingen-Oslo ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Feidhmíonn SFManna níos fearr ná RNNs in Emoji Prediction', 'hu': 'Tubingen-Oslo a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Az SVM-k jobban teljesítenek, mint az RNN-ek az Emoji jóslásban', 'el': 'Τούμπινγκεν-Όσλο στο Καθήκον 2: Τα SVM αποδίδουν καλύτερα από τα RNN στην πρόβλεψη Εμόζι', 'ka': 'ტუბინგენ-ოსლო SemEval-2018 დავალება 2: SVMs გავაკეთებთ უფრო უფრო მეტი RNN-ზე Emoji წინაწერებაში', 'it': 'Tubingen-Oslo a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Gli SVM hanno prestazioni migliori degli RNN in Emoji Prediction', 'kk': 'Тубинген- Осло 2- тапсырмасында 2- тапсырма: SVMs Emoji Prediction RNN- ден жақсы орындайды', 'lt': 'Tubingen-Oslo at SemEval-2018 Task 2: SVMs perform better than RNNs in Emoji Prediction', 'ms': 'Tubingen-Oslo di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: SVMs melakukan lebih baik daripada RNN dalam Prediksi Emoji', 'mk': 'Tubingen-Oslo на SemEval-2018 задача 2: СВМ изведуваат подобро од РНН во предвидувањето на Емоја', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2-ല്\u200d ടുബിങ്ങിന്\u200d- ഓസ്ലോ: എമോയി പ്രിന്റിഷനിലെ എംഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200dസിനെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ലത് എസ്\u200cവിഎസ്', 'mt': 'Tubingen-Oslo f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 2: SVMs iwettqu aħjar mill-RNNs fit-Tbassir Emoji', 'pl': 'Tubingen-Oslo na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: SVM działają lepiej niż RNN w prognozowaniu Emoji', 'no': 'Tubingen-Oslo på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2: SVMs utfør bedre enn RNN i Emoji-forordning', 'mn': 'Tubingen-Oslo at SemEval-2018 Task 2: SVMs perform better than RNN in Emoji Prediction', 'ro': 'Tubingen-Oslo la SemEval-2018 Task 2: SVM-urile performează mai bine decât RNN-urile în Predicția Emoji', 'sr': 'Tubingen-Oslo na pola Evala-2018 Task 2: SVMs izvršava bolje od RNN-a u Emoji predviđanju', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Tubingen-Oslo at SemEval-2018 Task 2: SVMs waxay sameeyaan wax ka wanaagsan RNNs in Emoji Prediction', 'sv': 'Tubingen-Oslo på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: SVM presterar bättre än RNN i Emoji Prediction', 'ur': 'ٹوبینگن-اوسلو کے ساتھ عمومی-2018 ٹاکس ۲: SVMs ایموجی پردیکت میں RNN سے بہتر عمل کرتے ہیں', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 2- ல் டபிங்ஜென்- ஒஸ்லோ: எம்ஜி முன்னிருப்பத்தை விட சிறந்த செயல்படுத்து', 'vi': 'Tubiển-Oslo Tại nhiệm vụ SemEvl-208: SVMs trình diễn tốt hơn RNNs trong mặc định Emoji', 'uz': 'Name', 'hr': 'Tubingen-Oslo na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 2: SVG izvršava bolje od RNN-a u predviđanju Emoji', 'nl': "Tubingen-Oslo op SemEval-2018 Taak 2: SVM's presteren beter dan RNN's in Emoji Prediction", 'de': 'Aufgabe 2: SVMs schneiden besser ab als RNNs in der Emoji-Vorhersage', 'id': 'Tubingen-Oslo di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: SVM berhasil lebih baik dari RNN dalam Prediksi Emoji', 'ko': 'Tubingen Oslo가SemEval-18 임무2: 벡터기 지원 표정 예측에 있어 RNN보다 우수한 표현', 'bg': 'Тубинген-Осло на Задача 2: СВМ се представят по-добре от РНН в прогнозирането на емоджи', 'fa': 'توبینگن-اوسلو در ماموریت ۲۰۱۸: SVMs better than RNN in Emoji Prediction', 'da': "Tubingen-Oslo på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: SVM'er klarer sig bedre end RNN'er i Emoji Forudsigelse", 'af': 'Tubingen- Oslo by SemEval- 2018 Opdrag 2: SVMs uitvoer beter as RNN in Emoji voorskou', 'sw': 'Tubingen-Oslo katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 2: SVMs wanafanya kazi vizuri kuliko RNN katika Udhibiti wa Emoji', 'tr': 'Tubingen-Oslo at SemEval-2018 Task 2: SVMs perform better than RNNs in Emoji Prediction', 'az': "SemEval-2018 Task 2: SVMs Emoji Prediction'da RNN'l…ôrd…ôn daha yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôr edir", 'am': 'ስራ 2:SVMs በኤሞጂ ፕሪዝርት ውስጥ ከRNNs ይልቅ የተሻለ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের টাবিঙ্গেন-ওস্লো: এমোজি প্রেসিডেন্টের চেয়ে ভালো এসভিএমএনএনএন-এর কাজ করেছেন।', 'hy': 'Թուբինգեն-Օսլոն, 2018-ի «Սեմեվալ» 2-րդ հանձնարարությունում. ՍՎՄ-ները ավելի լավ են աշխատում, քան Էմոյի կանխատեսումում', 'cs': 'Tubingen-Oslo na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: SVM fungují lépe než RNN v předpovědi Emoji', 'bs': 'Tubingen-Oslo na pola Evala-2018 Task 2: SVMs izvršava bolje od RNN-a u predviđanju Emoji', 'et': 'Tubingen-Oslo SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 2: SVM-id on emojiprognoosis paremad kui RNN-id', 'fi': 'Tubingen-Oslo SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: SVM:t suoriutuvat paremmin kuin RNN:t Emoji-ennusteessa', 'ca': 'Tubingen-Oslo a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Les SVM actuen millor que els RNN en Emoji Prediction', 'sq': 'Tubingen-Oslo në SemEval-2018 Task 2: SVMs perform better than RNNs in Emoji Prediction', 'jv': 'Tubingenen-oslo nang semebal-2008 task 2: SVM Gak dhéwé luwih karo DNNs nang emuji predikion', 'he': 'Tubingen-Oslo ב SemEval-2018 משימה 2: SVMs מבצעים טוב יותר מ RNN בתחזית Emoji', 'sk': 'Tubingen-Oslo na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: SVMs uspešnejši od RNN v napovedi Emoji', 'ha': 'Tubingen-oslo at SemEV-2018 Taskon 2: SV M aikin mafiya alhẽri daga RNNs in Emoji Prediction', 'bo': 'Tubingen-Oslo at SemEval-2018 Task 2: SVMs perform better than RNNs in Emoji Prediction'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our participation in the SemEval-2018 task Multilingual Emoji Prediction. We participated in both English and Spanish subtasks, experimenting with support vector machines (SVMs) and recurrent neural networks. Our SVM classifier obtained the top rank in both subtasks with macro-averaged F1-measures of 35.99 % for English and 22.36 % for Spanish data sets. Similar to a few earlier attempts, the results with neural networks were not on par with linear SVMs.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa participação na tarefa SemEval-2018 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Participamos de subtarefas em inglês e espanhol, experimentando máquinas de vetores de suporte (SVMs) e redes neurais recorrentes. Nosso classificador SVM obteve a classificação mais alta em ambas as subtarefas com medidas F1 com média macro de 35,99% para conjuntos de dados em inglês e 22,36% para conjuntos de dados em espanhol. Semelhante a algumas tentativas anteriores, os resultados com redes neurais não estavam no mesmo nível dos SVMs lineares.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestra participación en la tarea Semeval-2018 Predicción multilingüe de emojis. Participamos en subtareas en inglés y español, experimentando con máquinas de vectores de soporte (SVM) y redes neuronales recurrentes. Nuestro clasificador SVM obtuvo el primer puesto en ambas subtareas con medidas F1 macropromediadas del 35,99% para los conjuntos de datos en inglés y 22,36% para el español. Al igual que en algunos intentos anteriores, los resultados con las redes neuronales no estuvieron a la par con las SVM lineales.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركتنا في مهمة SemEval-2018 توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات. شاركنا في المهام الفرعية باللغتين الإنجليزية والإسبانية ، وقمنا بتجربة آلات ناقلات الدعم (SVMs) والشبكات العصبية المتكررة. حصل مصنف SVM الخاص بنا على المرتبة الأولى في كلتا المهمتين الفرعيتين بمقاييس F1 ذات متوسط ماكرو تبلغ 35.99٪ للغة الإنجليزية و 22.36٪ لمجموعات البيانات الإسبانية. على غرار بضع محاولات سابقة ، لم تكن النتائج مع الشبكات العصبية على قدم المساواة مع SVMs الخطية.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre participation à la tâche SemeVal-2018 Prédiction multilingue des emoji. Nous avons participé à des sous-tâches en anglais et en espagnol, expérimentant des machines à vecteurs de support (SVM) et des réseaux de neurones récurrents. Notre classificateur SVM a obtenu le premier rang dans les deux sous-tâches avec des mesures F1 macro-moyennes de 35,99\xa0% pour l'anglais et de 22,36\xa0% pour les ensembles de données espagnols. À l'instar de quelques tentatives précédentes, les résultats obtenus avec les réseaux de neurones n'étaient pas comparables à ceux des SVM linéaires.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018タスクの多言語絵文字予測への参加について説明します。英語とスペイン語の両方のサブタスクに参加し、サポートベクターマシン（ SVM ）と再帰的ニューラルネットワークを実験しました。当社のSVM分類器は、両方のサブタスクでトップランクを獲得し、マクロ平均F 1メジャーは、英語35.99 ％、スペイン語22.36 ％です。先のいくつかの試みと同様に、ニューラルネットワークの結果は線形SVMと同等ではありませんでした。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 कार्य बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी में हमारी भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है। हमने अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश दोनों उप-कार्यों में भाग लिया, समर्थन वेक्टर मशीनों (एसवीएम) और आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ प्रयोग किया। हमारे एसवीएम क्लासिफायर ने अंग्रेजी के लिए 35.99% और स्पेनिश डेटा सेट के लिए 22.36% के मैक्रो-औसत F1-उपायों के साथ दोनों उप-कार्यों में शीर्ष रैंक प्राप्त की। कुछ पहले के प्रयासों के समान, तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ परिणाम रैखिक एसवीएम के बराबर नहीं थे।', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2018事多言表情符号占。 参英语西班牙语子,试向量机(SVM)递归神经网络。 吾 SVM 器在两任中皆得最高第,其英语宏观均 F1 度量值为 35.99%,西班牙语数集为 22.36%。 与早试相类,神经网络与线性SVM相上下。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наше участие в задаче SemEval-2018 «Многоязычное предсказание эмодзи». Мы участвовали как в английской, так и в испанской подзадачах, экспериментируя с машинами поддержки векторов (SVM) и рекуррентными нейронными сетями. Наш классификатор виртуальных машин защиты занял первое место в обеих подзадачах с макроусредненными значениями F1 - 35,99% для английского и 22,36% для испанского наборов данных. Аналогично нескольким предыдущим попыткам, результаты с нейросетями не были наравне с линейными виртуальными машинами защиты.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár rannpháirtíocht sa tasc SemEval-2018 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Ghlacamar páirt i bhfothascanna Béarla agus Spáinnis araon, ag tástáil le meaisíní veicteora tacaíochta (SVManna) agus líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha. Bhain ár n-aicmitheoir SVM an chéim is airde amach sa dá fhothasc le bearta F1 macra-mheánmhéide de 35.99% don Bhéarla agus 22.36% do thacair sonraí Spáinneacha. Cosúil le roinnt iarrachtaí níos luaithe, ní raibh na torthaí le líonraí néaracha ar aon dul le SFManna líneacha.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 Többnyelvű Emoji Prediction feladatban való részvételünket. Részt vettünk angol és spanyol részfeladatokban, kísérleteztünk támogató vektorgépekkel (SVM) és visszatérő neurális hálózatokkal. SVM osztályozónk mindkét altevékenységben megszerezte a legmagasabb rangot, makróátlagos F1 mértékekkel az angol nyelven 35,99%, spanyol nyelven pedig 22,36%. Néhány korábbi kísérlethez hasonlóan a neurális hálózatokkal kapcsolatos eredmények nem voltak azonos a lineáris SVM-ekkel.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή μας στην εργασία Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη εμόζι. Συμμετείχαμε τόσο σε αγγλικές όσο και σε ισπανικές δευτερεύουσες εργασίες, πειραματιζόμενοι με μηχανές υποστήριξης και επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα. Ο ταξινομητής SVM απέκτησε την κορυφαία θέση και στις δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες με μακρομετρημένα μέτρα F1 35,99% για τα αγγλικά και 22,36% για τα ισπανικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Παρόμοια με μερικές προηγούμενες προσπάθειες, τα αποτελέσματα των νευρωνικών δικτύων δεν ήταν ισοδύναμα με τα γραμμικά SVM.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერს ჩვენი დაწყვეტილება SemEval-2018 მრავალენგური Emoji წინაწყებაში. ჩვენ ინგლისური და სპანელი საზოგადოებში გავაკეთებდით, ექსპერიმენტირებული ვიქტორის მაქანებით (SVMs) და რეკურენტირებული ნეიროლური ქსელებით. ჩვენი SVM კლასიფიკაციატორი მიღეთ ყველაზე მეტი წერტილი ორივე წერტილებში, რომელიც მაკრო განსაზღვრებული F1- ზომის 35.99% ინგლისური და 22.36% სოფლიონური მონაცემებისთვის. როგორც რამდენიმე პირველი პროცემებისთვის, შედეგი ნეიროლური ქსელები არ იყო ლეინური SVMs.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra partecipazione al compito SemEval-2018 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Abbiamo partecipato a sottoattività inglesi e spagnole, sperimentando macchine vettoriali di supporto (SVM) e reti neurali ricorrenti. Il nostro classificatore SVM ha ottenuto il primo posto in entrambe le sottoattività con misure F1 macro-medie del 35,99% per l'inglese e del 22,36% per i set di dati spagnoli. Simile ad alcuni tentativi precedenti, i risultati con le reti neurali non erano alla pari con SVM lineari.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің бірнеше тілді эмози тапсырмасында қатысуымызды таңдайды. Біз ағылшын тілінде де, Испан тілінде қатынасыз келді, вектор машиналарында (SVMs) және қайталанатын невралды желілерде тәжірибеледі. SVM классификаторымыздың ең жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғар Кейбір алдыңғы әрекеттерге сияқты, невралдық желілердің нәтижелері сызық SVMs- лерімен бірдей жоқ.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų dalyvavimas rengiant 2018 m. SemEval užduotį „Daugiakalbis Emoji prognozė“. Dalyvavome tiek anglų, tiek ispanų subtaskuose, eksperimentuojant su paramos vektorių mašinomis (SVM) ir nuolatiniais nervų tinklais. Mūsų SVM klasifikatorius pasiekė aukščiausią rangą abiejuose pakopase su makroekonominiu vidurkiu F1 rodikliais 35,99 % anglų ir 22,36 % ispanų duomenų rinkiniuose. Panašiai kaip ir keli ankstesni bandymai, rezultatai naudojant nervinius tinklus nebuvo lygiaverčiai linijiniams SVM.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашето учество во задачата SemEval-2018 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Учествувавме на англиски и шпански потпрашања, експериментирајќи со векторни машини за поддршка (SVMs) и рецидентни нервни мрежи. Нашиот класификатор на СВМ го доби највисокиот ранг во двете подзадачи со макро-просечни F1 мерки од 35,99 отсто за англиски и 22,36 отсто за шпански податоци. Similar to a few earlier attempts, the results with neural networks were not on par with linear SVMs.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-parteċipazzjoni tagħna fil-kompitu SemEval-2018 Tbassir Emoji Multilingwi. Aħna pparteċipajna kemm f’sottomistoqsijiet Ingliżi kif ukoll Spanjoli, bl-esperimentazzjoni b’magni ta’ appoġġ għall-vetturi (SVMs) u netwerks newrali rikorrenti. Il-klassifikatur SVM tagħna kiseb l-ogħla klassifikazzjoni fiż-żewġ sottotalbiet b’miżuri F1 makro-medji ta’ 35.99% għall-Ingliż u 22.36% għas-settijiet tad-dejta Spanjoli. Bħal ftit tentattivi preċedenti, ir-riżultati tan-netwerks newrali ma kinux daqs SVMs lineari.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan ketertarikan kita dalam SemEval-2018 tugas Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Kami berpartisipasi dalam subtasks Inggeris dan Sepanyol, eksperimen dengan mesin vektor sokongan (SVMs) dan rangkaian saraf berulang. Pengklasifikasi SVM kami mendapat peringkat tertinggi dalam kedua-dua subtasks dengan ukuran F1 makro-rata-rata 35.99% untuk Inggeris dan 22.36% untuk set data Spanyol. Sama seperti beberapa percubaan sebelumnya, keputusan rangkaian saraf tidak sama dengan SVM linear.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കാളിയാണെന്ന് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും സ്പാനിഷ് ഉപാധികളിലും പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. പിന്നീട് പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d യന്ത്രങ്ങളുമായി പരീക് ഞങ്ങളുടെ SVM ക്ലാസ്പാനിഷ് ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഏറ്റവും മുകളിലുള്ള പദവിയുണ്ടായിരുന്നു. കുറച്ച് മുമ്പ് ശ്രമിച്ചത് പോലെ, ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കുമുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ലൈനര്\u200d എസ്\u200cവിഎസ് മുഖേന പാര്\u200dക്', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2018-н олон хэлний эмози хэлний тайлбарт оролцож байгааг тайлбарладаг. Бид Англи болон Испан хэлний сургуульд оролцсон, вектор машинууд (SVMs) болон дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд туршилт хийж байлаа. Бидний SVM классификатор хоёр доор нь Макро дундаж F1-ийн хэмжээсүүд нь 35.99% Англи хэл болон 22.36% Испанийн өгөгдлийн хэмжээсүүд дээд хэмжээсүүд авсан. Өмнөх хэдэн туршилттай адилхан, мэдрэлийн сүлжээний үр дүн нь шугам SVMs-тэй холбоотой байхгүй.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie participarea noastră la sarcina SemEval-2018 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Am participat atât la subactivități engleze cât și spaniole, experimentând cu mașini vectoriale de suport (SVM) și rețele neurale recurente. Clasificatorul nostru SVM a obținut primul loc în ambele subactivități cu măsurători F1 macro-medii de 35,99% pentru limba engleză și 22,36% pentru seturile de date spaniole. Similar cu câteva încercări anterioare, rezultatele cu rețelele neurale nu au fost la egalitate cu SVM-urile liniare.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz udział w zadaniu SemEval-2018 Wielojęzyczna prognoza Emoji. Uczestniczyliśmy zarówno w podzadaniach angielskich, jak i hiszpańskich, eksperymentując z maszynami wektorowymi wsparcia (SVM) i powtarzającymi się sieciami neuronowymi. Nasz klasyfikator SVM uzyskał najwyższą pozycję w obu podzadaniach z makro-średnią miarą F1 35,99% dla angielskiego i 22,36% dla hiszpańskich zbiorów danych. Podobnie jak kilka wcześniejszych prób, wyniki z sieci neuronowych nie były na równi z liniowymi SVM.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje na拧e sudjelovanje u zadatku semiEval-2018 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. 校褔邪褋褌懈谢懈 褋屑芯 薪邪 邪薪谐谢懈泄褋泻懈屑 懈 懈褋锌邪薪褋泻懈屑 褋褍斜锌芯褌邪泻懈屑邪, 械泻褋锌械褉懈屑械薪褌懈褉邪褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褯懈 褋邪 胁械泻褌芯褉褋泻懈屑懈 屑邪褕懈薪邪屑懈 (SVMs) 懈 锌芯胁褌芯褉械薪懈屑 薪械胁褉邪谢薪懈屑 屑褉械卸懈屑邪. Na拧 klasifikator SVM dobio je najbolji rank u obje subaske sa makro-srednjim mjerama F1 od 35,99% za engleski i 22,36% za 拧panjolske sete podataka. Sli猫no nekoliko ranijih poku拧aja, rezultati neuralnih mre啪a nisu bili na pari sa linearnim SVM-ima.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår deltakast i semiEval-2018-oppgåva Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Vi deltok på både engelsk og spansk underspørsmål, eksperimenterer med støtte for vektormaskiner (SVMs) og gjentaande neuralnettverk. SVM-klassifiserer vårt fikk den øvre rekninga i begge undersøk med makro gjennomsnittt F1-mål på 35,99 % for engelsk og 22,36 % for spanske datasett. Lik på noen tidlegare forsøk, resultatet med nøyralnettverk var ikkje på samme med lineære SVMs.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සම්වේල් 2018 වැඩේ ගොඩක් භාෂාවික එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධානයක් විස්තර කරනවා. අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් සබ්බැක්ස් දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, වෙක්ටර් යන්ත්\u200dරය (SVMs) සහ ආපහු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අපේ SVM විශේෂකයා ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය සහ ස්පැනිස් දත්ත සැට් සඳහා මැක්රෝවිමිත F1-මාර්ගය 35.99% විතරයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාව සඳහා 22.36 මුලින් උත්සාහ කලින් කිහිපයකට වගේ, න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran qayb-ka qeybqaadashada shaqada SemEval-2018 Qediyada luuqadaha badan ee Emoji. Waxaannu ka qeybqaadanay labada hawlaha ingiriiska iyo Isbanish, baaritaanka ku sameynaya mashiinka kaalmada wadista (SVMs) iyo shabakado naafada ah oo soo socda. Shaqeybtayada SVM wuxuu helay shahaadada sare ee labada shabakad oo macro-average F1-measures oo ah 35.99% ingiriisiga iyo 22.36% kooxda danbiyada Isbanish. Isoo mid ah dhawr jarrabo hore, dhamaadka shabakada neurada ah lama sameyn karo xafiiska SVMs linear ah.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt deltagande i SemEval-2018-uppgiften Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Vi deltog i både engelska och spanska underuppgifter, experimenterade med stödvektormaskiner (SVM) och återkommande neurala nätverk. Vår SVM-klassificerare fick högsta ranking i båda delaktiviteterna med makrogränsade F1-mått på 35,99% för engelska och 22,36% för spanska datauppsättningar. I likhet med några tidigare försök var resultaten med neurala nätverk inte i nivå med linjära SVM.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் SemEval-2018 பணியில் எங்கள் பகிர்ந்ததை விளக்குகிறது பல மொழி எமோஜி முன்னுரிமையில். நாங்கள் ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் துணை பணிகளுக்கும் பகிர்ந்தோம், ஆதரவு இயந்திரங்களுடன் (SVMs) மற்றும் திரும்ப ப புதிய பிணை எங்கள் எஸ்விஎம் வகுப்பாளர் துணை பணிகளில் இருவரும் மேல் பட்டத்தை பெற்றுள்ளது மேக்ரோ சராசரி F1- அளவுகளுடன் 35. 99% ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் 22. 36% ஸ்ப சில முன்னோக்கிய முயற்சிகளுக்கு போன்ற, புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களுடைய முடிவுகள் வரிசையான SVMs உடன் இணைப்பு இல்லை.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہمارا حصہ سیم Eval-2018 کے کام میں بہت سی زبان ایموزی پیش کرتی ہے۔ ہم انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی سوپٹسس میں مشارکت کرتے تھے، ویکتور ماشین (SVMs) اور دوبارہ نیورال نیورال نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے تھے۔ ہمارے SVM کلیسٹر نے دونوں مکرو متوسط F1 کے مطابق 35.99% کے مطابق اور 22.36% کے مطابق اسپانیایی ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق سب سے بالا رقم پایا۔ کچھ پہلے کی کوشش کے مطابق، نیورل نیٹورک کے نتیجے linear SVMs کے ساتھ پار نہیں ہوئے تھے.', 'vi': 'Bài báo này mô tả sự tham gia của chúng ta trong nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 hạn phát ngôn Emoji. Chúng tôi tham gia cả âm mưu Anh và Tây Ban Nha, thử nghiệm với các cỗ máy vector (SVMs) và mạng thần kinh thường leo trèo. Người phân loại SVM của chúng tôi đã đạt được cấp cao trong cả hai mặt phụ đề có tính số F1 siêu lục định giá cao của 35.97. for English and 22.36. for Spanish data set. Giống như vài lần trước, kết quả với mạng thần kinh không giống với các cử chỉ tương tự tuyến.', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval-2018 vazifaning qismlarimizni ko'plab turli tillar Emoji prezidenti aytadi. Biz Inglizcha va Ispanchaga hamma vazifalarga qayta ishlatdik, va vektor mashinalari (SVMs) va qaytadan tarmoq tarmoqlarini tajriba qildik. @ info Bir necha ishlatilgan bir necha sinab, neyrol tarmoqning natijalari linear SVMs bilan parcha emas.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва участието ни в задачата Многоезична прогноза за емоджи. Участвахме както в английски, така и в испански подзадачи, експериментирайки с помощни векторни машини (SVMs) и повтарящи се невронни мрежи. Нашият класификатор получи най-висок ранг и в двете подзадачи с макросреднени мерки от 35,99% за английски и 22,36% за испански масиви от данни. Подобно на няколко по-ранни опита, резултатите с невронните мрежи не са равни с линейните СВМ.', 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft onze deelname aan de SemEval-2018 taak Meertalige Emoji Prediction. We namen deel aan zowel Engelse als Spaanse subtaken en experimenteerden met ondersteunende vectormachines (SVM's) en terugkerende neurale netwerken. Onze SVM classificator behaalde de hoogste rang in beide subtaken met macro-gemiddelde F1-maten van 35,99% voor Engels en 22,36% voor Spaanse datasets. Net als een paar eerdere pogingen waren de resultaten met neurale netwerken niet op gelijke voet met lineaire SVM's.", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unsere Teilnahme an der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe Mehrsprachige Emoji Vorhersage. Wir nahmen sowohl an englischen als auch spanischen Teilaufgaben teil und experimentierten mit Support Vector Machines (SVMs) und wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerken. Unser SVM-Klassifikator erreichte den höchsten Rang in beiden Teilaufgaben mit makro-gemittelten F1-Messungen von 35,99% für Englisch und 22,36% für spanische Datensätze. Ähnlich wie bei einigen früheren Versuchen waren die Ergebnisse mit neuronalen Netzen nicht auf Augenhöhe mit linearen SVMs.', 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver vores deltagelse i SemEval-2018 opgaven Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Vi deltog i både engelske og spanske underopgaver og eksperimenterede med støttevektormaskiner (SVM'er) og tilbagevendende neurale netværk. Vores SVM-klassificering opnåede den øverste rang i begge underopgaver med makro-gennemsnit F1-målinger på 35,99% for engelsk og 22,36% for spanske datasæt. Ligesom nogle få tidligere forsøg var resultaterne med neurale netværk ikke på niveau med lineære SVM'er.", 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18 미션에 참여한 다국어 표정 예측의 상황을 묘사한다.우리는 영어와 스페인어의 하위 임무에 참여해 벡터기(SVM) 지원과 귀속 신경 네트워크로 실험을 진행했다.우리의 SVM 분류기는 이 두 하위 작업 중 가장 높은 순위를 차지했고 영어와 스페인어 데이터 집합의 거시적 평균 F1 측정치는 각각 35.99%와 22.36% 였다.이전의 몇 차례의 시도와 유사하게 신경 네트워크의 결과는 선형 지원 벡터기와 다르다.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše učestvovanje u zadatku za semiEval-2018 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. učestvovali smo na engleskim i španjolskim podacima, eksperimentirajući s strojevima za podršku vektora (SVMs) i ponovnim neuralnim mrežama. Naš klasifikator SVM dobio je najbolji rank u obje podkaze s makro-srednjim mjerama F1 od 35,99% za engleski i 22,36% za španjolske podatke. Slični nekoliko ranijih pokušaja, rezultati neuralnih mreža nisu bili u pari s linearnim SVM-ima.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaelezea ushiriki wetu katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 Utawala wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji. Tumeshiriki katika kazi zote za Kiingereza na Kihispania, tukijaribu kwa mashine yanayounga mkono vector (SVMs) na mitandao ya kijamii yanayoendelea. Mfanuzi wetu wa SVM alipata nafasi ya juu katika kazi zote hizo kwa kiwango cha wastani cha F1 kwa asilimia 35.99 kwa Kiingereza na asilimia 22.36 kwa seti za takwimu za Kihispania. Kama ilivyo kwa majaribio machache yaliyopita, matokeo yaliyohusiana na mitandao ya kijamii hayakuwa kwenye mazungumzo yenye simu ya SVMs.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons gedeelte in die half-Eval-2018 taak Multilingual Emoji voorskrif. Ons het gedeel in beide Engels en Spaanse subtaske, eksperimenteer met ondersteunde vektormasjiene (SVMs) en herhaalde neuralnetwerke. Ons SVM klassifiseerder het die boonste rank in beide subtaske ontvang met makro- gemiddelde F1- maatjies van 35. 99% vir Engels en 22. 36% vir Spaanse data stelle. Lik soos 'n paar vroeëre probeer, die resultate met neurale netwerke was nie op par met lineêre SVMs.", 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan participasi kita dalam SemEval-2018 tugas Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Kami berpartisipasi dalam subtasks bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol, eksperimen dengan mesin vektor dukungan (SVMs) dan jaringan saraf yang berulang-ulang. Klasifikasi SVM kami mendapatkan rangka atas dalam kedua subtasks dengan makro-rata-rata F1 ukuran 35,99% untuk Inggris dan 22,36% untuk set data Spanyol. Sama seperti beberapa percobaan sebelumnya, hasil jaringan saraf tidak sama dengan SVM linear.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت ما را توصیف می\u200cکند در وظیفه\u200cی عملیات نیم Eval-2018 در پیشنهاد Emoji Multilingual. ما با ماشین های پشتیبانی ویکتور (SVMs) و شبکه های عصبی بازگشت شرکت کردیم. کلیسار SVM ما بالاترین درجه در هر دو زیر درجه با اندازه\u200cهای متوسط F1 از 35.99 درصد برای انگلیسی و 22.36 درصد برای مجموعه داده\u200cهای اسپانیایی گرفته است. شبیه چند تلاش پیشین نتیجه\u200cهای شبکه\u200cهای عصبی با SVMs\u200cهای خطی نیستند.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր մասնակցությունը 2018 թվականի "Սեմեվալ-2018"-ի "Բազլեզու էմոյի կանխատեսումը": We participated in both English and Spanish subtasks, experimenting with support vector machines (SVMs) and recurrent neural networks.  Մեր ԱՎՄ դասակարգիչը ստացավ երկու ենթաթերթերում ամենաբարձր դասակարգը, որտեղ մակրոմիջին F1 չափումները 35.99 տոկոսի էին անգլերենում և 22.36 տոկոսի՝ իսպաներեն տվյալների համակարգերում: Նման մի քանի նախկին փորձերին, նյարդային ցանցերի արդյունքները չեն համապատասխանում գծային ՎԻՄ-ների հետ:', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň SemEval-2018 sany Multilingual Emoji Prediksiýasynda chikanchasymyzy tassyklaýar. Biz iňlisçe we ispanyýanyň alt soraglarynda, vektör maşynlary (SVMs) we ýene-täsirli näralnetlerde test edip otyrdyk. Biziň SVM klassifikamyz iki astrapda makro ortalyk çykyşy bilen iňlis dili üçin 35.99% diýp hasaplanýardy we 22.36% diýp hasaplanýardy. Birnäçe öňki synanyşyň ýaly näyral şebekeleriň netijesi çyzgyly SVMs bilen meňzeşli däldi.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull përshkruan pjesëmarrjen tonë në detyrën SemEval-2018 Predikimin Emoji Shumë-gjuhës. Ne morëm pjesë në nëndetyrat angleze dhe spanjolle, duke eksperimentuar me mjetet vectore të mbështetjes (SVMs) dhe rrjetet neurale të përsëritura. Klasifikuesi ynë SVM mori rendin më të lartë në të dy nëndetyrat me masë-mesatare F1 prej 35.99% për anglisht dhe 22.36% për grupet e të dhënave spanjolle. Të ngjashme me disa përpjekje të mëparshme, rezultatet me rrjetet nervore nuk ishin në krahasim me SVM lineare.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজের অংশগ্রহণের ব্যাখ্যা করেছে মাল্টিভুয়াল এমোজি প্রেশন। We participated in both English and Spanish subtasks, experimenting with support vector machines (SVMs) and recurrent neural networks.  আমাদের এসভিএম বিশ্লেষক উভয় সাবট্যাক্টাসে সর্বোচ্চ স্থান পেয়েছেন, যেখানে ম্যাক্রো গড়ে ফেসবুকের ৩৫. ৯% ইংরেজী এবং ২২. কয়েকটি প্রাক্তন প্রচেষ্টার সমতুল্য, নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের ফলাফল লাইনিয়ার এসভিমের সাথে পারে না।', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSemEval-2018 ስራ ተግባራችንን በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ኢዮጂ አካላት ይናገራል፡፡ We participated in both English and Spanish subtasks, experimenting with support vector machines (SVMs) and recurrent neural networks.  የSVM ክፍላፊያችን ለስፓኒሽ ዳታ ማክሮው ተቃውሞ 35.99 በመቶ ኢንግሊዝኛ እና 22.36 በመቶ ለስፓኒሽ ዳታ ማዕከላዊ ስርዓቶች ደረጃ አግኝቷል፡፡ እንደዚህ ለጥቂት ቀድሞ ፈተናዎች፣ የኔural network ውጤቶች በጥሩ SVMs ጥያቄ የተደረገ አይደሉም፡፡', 'ca': 'Aquest article descriu la nostra participació en la SemEval-2018 tasca Multilingual Emoji Prediction. We participated in both English and Spanish subtasks, experimenting with support vector machines (SVMs) and recurrent neural networks.  El nostre classificador SVM va obtenir el primer rangde les dues subtaskes amb mitjanes de F1 de 35,99% en anglès i 22,36% en conjunts de dades espanyols. Semellant a alguns intents anteriors, els resultats de les xarxes neurals no estaven en comparació amb els SVM linears.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim SemEval-2018 işin in çoxlu dil Emoji Özünün təsdiqlənməsini təsdiqləyir. Biz İngilizce və İspanyol subtasklarına, vektor maşınları (SVMs) və yenidən nöral ağları ilə təcrübə edirik. Bizim SVM klasifikatımız İspanyolca veri quruları üçün makro-ortalamalı F1 ölçüləri ilə ən yüksək dərəcə qəbul etdi. Bir neçə əvvəlki imtahana bənzəyir, nöral a ğlarının sonuçları linear SVMs ilə eyni deyildi.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kerrotaan osallistumisestamme SemEval-2018 -tehtävään Multilingual Emoji Ennuste. Osallistuimme sekä englannin että espanjan alitehtäviin kokeilemalla tukivektorikoneita (SVM) ja toistuvia hermoverkkoja. SVM-luokittelijamme saavutti korkeimman sijoituksen molemmissa alitehtävissä makrokeskiarvoilla F1-mittareilla 35,99% englanniksi ja 22,36% espanjaksi. Kuten muutamat aikaisemmat yritykset, neuroverkkojen tulokset eivät olleet samanarvoisia lineaaristen SVM:ien kanssa.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje naši účast na úkolu SemEval-2018 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Účastnili jsme se anglických i španělských dílčích úkolů, experimentovali s podpůrnými vektorovými stroji (SVM) a rekurentními neuronovými sítěmi. Náš klasifikátor SVM získal nejvyšší postavení v obou dílčích úkolech s makro průměrnými F1 měřítky 35,99% pro angličtinu a 22,36% pro španělské datové sady. Podobně jako několik dřívějších pokusů, výsledky s neuronovými sítěmi nebyly stejné jako lineární SVM.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u zadatku za polovinu Evala-2018 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Učestvovali smo i na engleskim i španjolskim podacima, eksperimentirajući s motorima za podršku vektora (SVMs) i recidivnim neuralnim mrežama. Naš klasifikator SVM dobio je najbolji rank u obje subaske sa makro-srednjim mjerama F1 od 35,99% za engleski i 22,36% za španjolske skupine podataka. Slični nekoliko ranijih pokušaja, rezultati neuralnih mreža nisu bili na pari sa linearnim SVM-ima.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie osalemist SemEval-2018 ülesandes Multilingual Emoji Ennustamine. Osalesime nii inglise kui ka hispaania alamülesannetes, eksperimenteerides tugivektorseadmeid (SVM) ja korduvaid neurovõrke. Meie SVM klassifitseerija saavutas mõlemas alamülesandes parima koha makrokeskmiste F1-mõõtmetega 35,99% inglise ja 22,36% hispaania andmekogumite puhul. Sarnaselt mõnele varasemale katsele ei olnud närvivõrkude tulemused samaväärsed lineaarsete SVM-idega.', 'jv': "This paper description us membersion in the semiinval-2013 task Multilanguage emuji predikion. Awak dhéwé éntuk akèh basa Inggris karo Spanyalan sak basa, nggawe nguasai perusahaan karo vector Global Sampeyan ngono durung piye masalah sing klopot, dadi gambaran karo tambah 'Neral' ora tau bagian karo SVM liyar.", 'he': 'This paper describes our participation in the SemEval-2018 task Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  השתתפנו גם בשאלות אנגלית וגם ספרדית, בניסויים עם מכונות ויקטורים תמיכה (SVMs) ורשתות עצביות חוזרות. מסגר SVM שלנו השיג את הדרגה העליונה בשני התשומות עם F1 ממוצע מקרו-ממוצע של 35.99% לאנגלית ו-22.36% לסטיטי נתונים ספרדיים. דומה לכמה ניסיונות קודמים, התוצאות עם רשתות עצביות לא היו שווים עם SVMs לינריות.', 'ha': 'Bu takardan na bayyana ushinanmu a cikin aikin SemEV-2018, multilugha Emoji Prediction. Mun yi raba cikin taskõkin Ingiriya da Isbaniya, masu jarraba kwamfyutan tebur masu ƙaranci (SvM) da zanayen neura na daura. Tsarin SvM ya sãmu babban daraja a cikin taskõkin dukansu da macro-aged F1-taki na 35.99% na Ingiriya da 22.36% na daidaita data na spanish. Similar to a few earlier attempts, the results with neural networks were not on par with linear SVMs.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisano naše sodelovanje v nalogi SemEval-2018 Večjezična napoved emojev. Sodelovali smo pri angleških in španskih podnalogah, eksperimentiranju s podpornimi vektorskimi stroji (SVM) in ponavljajočimi se nevronskimi omrežji. Naš razvrščevalec SVM je pridobil najvišjo uvrstitev v obeh podopravilih z makropovprečnimi merili F1 35,99% za angleščino in 22,36% za španske nabore podatkov. Podobno kot nekaj prejšnjih poskusov, rezultati z nevronskimi omrežji niso bili enaki linearnim SVM.', 'bo': 'ཤོག ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གཉིས་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོས་བར ང་ཚོའི་SVM དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མིན་པའི་ཚད་རྒྱ་ནག་ནང་གི་མགོ་མིའི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དཔའ་བཅས་ཉུང་ཙམ་དང་འགྱུར་བ་ཡོད་པའི་ཚོལ་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མཐུན་གྲངས་མེད།'}
{'en': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'ar': 'مهمة SemEval-2018 3: الكشف عن السخرية في التغريدات الإنجليزية', 'pt': 'Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2018: detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês', 'fr': "SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Détection de l'ironie dans les tweets en anglais", 'es': 'Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Detección de ironía en tuits en inglés', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク3 ：英語ツイートでの皮肉検出', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务3:英语推刺检', 'ru': 'SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Обнаружение иронии в твитах на английском языке', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3: अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाना', 'ga': 'SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Brath íoróin i Tweets Béarla', 'hu': 'SemEval-2018 feladat 3: Irónia felismerése angol tweetekben', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα Αγγλικά Τουίτερ', 'ka': 'SemEval-2018 სამუშაო დავალება 3: ინგლისური ტივიტებში აირონი განახლება', 'it': "SemEval-2018 Task 3: Rilevamento dell'ironia nei tweets inglesi", 'kk': 'Ағылшын tweets тізімдерінің шегі- 2018 тапсырмасы 3: Ирония тапсырмасы', 'lt': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'ms': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Pengesanan Irony dalam Tweets Inggeris', 'ml': 'സെമ്', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'no': 'SemEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Ironioppdaging i engelske tweeter', 'mt': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'pl': 'SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Wykrywanie ironii w angielskich tweetach', 'ro': 'SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Detectarea ironiei în tweeturile engleze', 'mk': 'SemEval-2018 задача 3: Детектирање на иронија на англиски твитови', 'sr': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ironijska detekcija na engleskim tweetima', 'so': 'SemEval-2018 Shaqo 3: Gariirka ajaanibta ee Ingiriis ku qoran Tweets', 'si': 'සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 3: ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් වල අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න', 'sv': 'SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Ironi Detection i engelska tweets', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 3: Iron Detection in English Tweets', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác-thẩm 8 3: phát hiện mỉa mai bằng tiếng Anh Tweet', 'uz': 'Eval- 2018 Task 3: Iron Detection in Ingliz Twitter', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Откриване на ирония в английски Туитс', 'nl': 'SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Ironie Detection in Engelse Tweets', 'hr': 'SemEval-2018 zadatak 3: Ironijska otkrića na engleskim tweetima', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 퀘스트 3: 영어 트윗의 반풍 검출', 'da': 'SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Irony Detection i engelske tweets', 'id': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Deteksi Ironi dalam Tweets Inggris', 'de': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ironie Detection in English Tweets', 'fa': 'ماموریت ۳: شناسایی آهنی در Tweets انگلیسی', 'sw': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 3: Ironic Detection in English Tweets', 'tr': 'SemEval-2018 Görev 3: Iňlisçe Tuýtalary Taýşart', 'af': 'SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Irony Opdekking in Engels Tweets', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Görev 3: İngilizce Tweets içində Irony Detection', 'bn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'bs': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ironijska detekcija na engleskim Tweets', 'cs': 'SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Detekce ironie v anglických tweetech', 'ca': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'sq': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'hy': 'Անգլերենի թվիթերում', 'et': 'SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 3: iroonia tuvastamine inglise keeles Tweets', 'fi': 'SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'jv': 'semi-2008 task 3: Kemerdekaan Kemerdekaan Inggris', 'sk': 'SemEval-2018 Naloga 3: Odkrivanje ironije v angleščini Tweets', 'ha': 'Dakata', 'bo': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'he': 'SemEval-2018 משימה 3: גילוי אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים'}
{'en': 'This paper presents the first shared task on irony detection : given a tweet, automatic natural language processing systems should determine whether the tweet is ironic (Task A) and which type of irony (if any) is expressed (Task B). The ironic tweets were collected using irony-related hashtags (i.e. # irony, # sarcasm, # not) and were subsequently manually annotated to minimise the amount of noise in the corpus. Prior to distributing the data, hashtags that were used to collect the tweets were removed from the corpus. For both tasks, a training corpus of 3,834 tweets was provided, as well as a test set containing 784 tweets. Our shared tasks received submissions from 43 teams for the binary classification Task A and from 31 teams for the multiclass Task B. The highest classification scores obtained for both subtasks are respectively F1= 0.71 and F1= 0.51 and demonstrate that fine-grained irony classification is much more challenging than binary irony detection.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة أول مهمة مشتركة حول الكشف عن المفارقة: بالنظر إلى تغريدة ، يجب أن تحدد أنظمة معالجة اللغة الطبيعية التلقائية ما إذا كانت التغريدة مثيرة للسخرية (المهمة أ) وأي نوع من السخرية (إن وجدت) يتم التعبير عنها (المهمة ب). تم جمع التغريدات الساخرة باستخدام علامات التجزئة ذات الصلة بالسخرية (على سبيل المثال ، #irony ، #sarcasm ، #not) وتم بعد ذلك شرحها يدويًا لتقليل مقدار الضوضاء في الجسم. قبل توزيع البيانات ، تمت إزالة علامات التجزئة التي تم استخدامها لجمع التغريدات من المجموعة. لكلتا المهمتين ، تم توفير مجموعة تدريب مكونة من 3834 تغريدة ، بالإضافة إلى مجموعة اختبار تحتوي على 784 تغريدة. تلقت مهامنا المشتركة تقديمات من 43 فريقًا لمهمة التصنيف الثنائي المهمة أ ومن 31 فريقًا للمهمة ب متعددة الفئات. أكثر صعوبة بكثير من كشف السخرية الثنائية.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta a primeira tarefa compartilhada na detecção de ironia: dado um tweet, sistemas automáticos de processamento de linguagem natural devem determinar se o tweet é irônico (Tarefa A) e que tipo de ironia (se houver) é expressa (Tarefa B). Os tweets irônicos foram coletados usando hashtags relacionadas à ironia (ou seja, #irony, #sarcasm, #not) e foram posteriormente anotados manualmente para minimizar a quantidade de ruído no corpus. Antes de distribuir os dados, as hashtags usadas para coletar os tweets foram removidas do corpus. Para ambas as tarefas, foi fornecido um corpus de treinamento de 3.834 tweets, bem como um conjunto de teste contendo 784 tweets. Nossas tarefas compartilhadas receberam submissões de 43 equipes para a classificação binária Tarefa A e de 31 equipes para a tarefa multiclasse B. As pontuações mais altas de classificação obtidas para ambas as subtarefas são respectivamente F1= 0,71 e F1= 0,51 e demonstram que a classificação de ironia refinada é muito mais desafiador do que a detecção de ironia binária.', 'fr': "Cet article présente la première tâche partagée sur la détection de l'ironie\xa0: à partir d'un tweet, les systèmes de traitement automatique du langage naturel devraient déterminer si le tweet est ironique (tâche A) et quel type d'ironie (le cas échéant) est exprimé (tâche B). Les tweets ironiques ont été collectés à l'aide de hashtags ironiques (par exemple #irony, #sarcasm, #not) et ont ensuite été annotés manuellement afin de minimiser la quantité de bruit dans le corpus. Avant la distribution des données, les hashtags utilisés pour collecter les tweets ont été supprimés du corpus. Pour les deux tâches, un corpus de formation de 3 834 tweets a été fourni, ainsi qu'un ensemble de tests contenant 784 tweets. Nos tâches partagées ont reçu des soumissions de 43 équipes pour la tâche de classification binaire A et de 31 équipes pour la tâche multiclasse B. Les scores de classement les plus élevés obtenus pour les deux sous-tâches sont respectivement F1 = 0,71 et F1 = 0,51 et démontrent que la classification par ironie fine est beaucoup plus difficile que la détection de l'ironie binaire.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta la primera tarea compartida sobre la detección de ironía: dado un tuit, los sistemas automáticos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural deben determinar si el tuit es irónico (Tarea A) y qué tipo de ironía (si la hay) se expresa (Tarea B). Los tuits irónicos se recopilaron utilizando etiquetas relacionadas con la ironía (por ejemplo, #irony, #sarcasm, #not) y posteriormente se anotaron manualmente para minimizar la cantidad de ruido en el corpus. Antes de distribuir los datos, se eliminaron del corpus los hashtags que se utilizaban para recopilar los tuits. Para ambas tareas, se proporcionó un corpus de capacitación de 3.834 tuits, así como un conjunto de pruebas que contenía 784 tuits. Nuestras tareas compartidas recibieron presentaciones de 43 equipos para la Tarea A de clasificación binaria y de 31 equipos para la Tarea B multiclase. Los puntajes de clasificación más altos obtenidos para ambas subtareas son, respectivamente, F1 = 0.71 y F1 = 0.51, y demuestran que la clasificación irónica precisa es mucho más desafiante. que la detección de ironía binaria.', 'ja': '本稿では、皮肉検出に関する最初の共有タスクを紹介する。つぶやきを与えられた場合、自動自然言語処理システムは、そのツイートが皮肉であるかどうか（タスクA ）、およびどのタイプの皮肉が表現されているか（もしあれば）を判断すべきである（タスクB ）。皮肉なツイートは、皮肉に関連するハッシュタグ（つまり、# irony、# sarcasm、# not ）を使用して収集され、その後、コーパス内のノイズの量を最小限に抑えるために手動で注釈が付けられました。データを配布する前に、ツイートを収集するために使用されたハッシュタグがコーパスから削除されました。両方のタスクについて、3,834件のツイートのトレーニングコーパスと、784件のツイートを含むテストセットが提供されました。私たちの共有タスクは、バイナリ分類タスクAの43チームとマルチクラスタスクBの31チームから提出を受けました。両方のサブタスクで得られた最高の分類スコアは、それぞれF 1 = 0.71、F 1 = 0.51であり、細かいアイロニー分類がバイナリアイロニー検出よりもはるかに困難であることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文举刺检之首:给定一推文,自自然语言处统推文宜定刺意(事A)及讽刺之类(有)(B)。 其有讽刺意味者推文用主题标(即#irony,#sarcasm,#not)所集,随为手动注以尽量减少语料库噪音量。 先分发数据,以收推文主题签已从语料库中删除。 凡此二务,供包 3,834 条推文训练语料库,及包 784 条推文之试集。 共得 43 团队二元之类 A 与 31 团队之多 B 。 二子得至分为 F1= 0.71 F1= 0.51,明细粒度刺检更具挑战性。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर विडंबना का पता लगाने पर पहला साझा कार्य प्रस्तुत करता है: एक ट्वीट को देखते हुए, स्वचालित प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण प्रणालियों को यह निर्धारित करना चाहिए कि क्या ट्वीट विडंबनापूर्ण है (कार्य ए) और किस प्रकार की विडंबना (यदि कोई हो) व्यक्त की जाती है (कार्य बी)। विडंबनात्मक ट्वीट्स को विडंबना से संबंधित हैशटैग (यानी #irony, #sarcasm, #not) का उपयोग करके एकत्र किया गया था और बाद में कॉर्पस में शोर की मात्रा को कम करने के लिए मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट किया गया था। डेटा वितरित करने से पहले, ट्वीट्स को इकट्ठा करने के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले हैशटैग को कॉर्पस से हटा दिया गया था। दोनों कार्यों के लिए, 3,834 ट्वीट्स का एक प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पस प्रदान किया गया था, साथ ही साथ 784 ट्वीट्स वाला एक परीक्षण सेट भी प्रदान किया गया था। हमारे साझा कार्यों को बाइनरी वर्गीकरण कार्य ए के लिए 43 टीमों से और मल्टीक्लास टास्क बी के लिए 31 टीमों से प्रस्तुतियां प्राप्त हुईं। दोनों उप-कार्यों के लिए प्राप्त उच्चतम वर्गीकरण स्कोर क्रमशः F1 = 0.71 और F1 = 0.51 हैं और यह दर्शाते हैं कि ठीक-दाने दार विडंबना वर्गीकरण बाइनरी विडंबना का पता लगाने की तुलना में बहुत अधिक चुनौतीपूर्ण है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена первая общая задача по обнаружению иронии: учитывая твит, автоматические системы обработки естественного языка должны определить, является ли твит иронией (Задача A) и какой тип иронии (если таковая имеется) выражается (Задача B). Иронические твиты были собраны с использованием хэштегов, связанных с иронией (т.е. #ирония, # сарказм, #нет), и впоследствии были вручную аннотированы, чтобы минимизировать количество шума в теле. Перед распространением данных хэштеги, которые использовались для сбора твитов, были удалены из корпуса. По обоим заданиям был предоставлен обучающий корпус из 3834 твитов, а также тестовый набор, содержащий 784 твита. Наши общие задачи получили представления от 43 команд для задачи бинарной классификации A и от 31 команды для многоклассовой задачи B. Самые высокие баллы классификации, полученные для обеих подзадач, соответственно F1= 0,71 и F1= 0,51 и демонстрируют, что мелкозернистая классификация иронии намного сложнее, чем обнаружение бинарной иронии.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair an chéad tasc roinnte ar bhrath íoróin: nuair a chuirtear tweet, ba cheart do chórais uathphróiseála teanga nádúrtha a chinneadh an bhfuil an tweet íorónta (Tasc A) agus cén cineál íoróin (más ann) a chuirtear in iúl (Tasc B). Bailíodh na tvuíteanna íorónta le haischlibeanna a bhain leis an íoróin (i.e. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) agus rinneadh anótáil orthu ina dhiaidh sin de láimh chun méid an torainn sa chorpas a íoslaghdú. Sular dáileadh na sonraí, baineadh hashtags a úsáideadh chun na tweets a bhailiú as an gcorpas. Don dá thasc, cuireadh corpas oiliúna de 3,834 tvuít ar fáil, chomh maith le tacar tástála ina raibh 784 tvuít. Fuair ár dtascanna comhroinnte aighneachtaí ó 43 fhoireann le haghaidh Tasc Aicmithe dénártha A agus ó 31 fhoireann don Tasc ilranga B. Is iad na scóir aicmithe is airde a fuarthas don dá fhothasc ná F1= 0.71 agus F1 = 0.51 faoi seach agus léiríonn siad go bhfuil aicmiú íoróin mínghearrtha ann. i bhfad níos dúshlánaí ná a bhrath íoróin dhénártha.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az irónia felismerésével kapcsolatos első közös feladatot: egy tweet esetén az automatikus természetes nyelvfeldolgozó rendszereknek meg kell határozniuk, hogy a tweet ironikus-e (A feladat), és milyen típusú irónia van kifejezve (B feladat). Az ironikus tweeteket iróniával kapcsolatos hashtag-ekkel (azaz #ironia, #szarkazmus, #not) gyűjtötték össze, majd kézzel jegyzetelték, hogy minimalizálják a korpuszban lévő zaj mennyiségét. Az adatok terjesztése előtt a tweetek összegyűjtéséhez használt hashtag-eket eltávolították a korpuszból. Mindkét feladathoz 834 tweetet tartalmazó képzési korpuszt, valamint 784 tweetet tartalmazó tesztkészletet biztosítottak. Közös feladatunk 43 csapattól érkezett be a bináris osztályozás A feladatához és 31 csapattól a többosztályos B feladathoz. Mindkét alcsoporthoz kapott legmagasabb osztályozási pontszámok F1= 0,71 és F1= 0,51, és bizonyítják, hogy a finomszemcsés ironia osztályozás sokkal nehezebb, mint a bináris irónia felismerése.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την πρώτη κοινή εργασία σχετικά με την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας: δεδομένου ενός tweet, τα αυτόματα συστήματα επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας θα πρέπει να καθορίσουν αν το tweet είναι ειρωνικό (εργασία Α) και ποιο είδος ειρωνείας (εάν υπάρχει) εκφράζεται (εργασία Β). Τα ειρωνικά tweets συλλέχθηκαν χρησιμοποιώντας hashtags που σχετίζονται με την ειρωνεία (δηλ. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) και στη συνέχεια σχολιάστηκαν χειροκίνητα για να ελαχιστοποιηθεί η ποσότητα θορύβου στο σώμα. Πριν από τη διανομή των δεδομένων, τα hashtags που χρησιμοποιήθηκαν για τη συλλογή των tweets αφαιρέθηκαν από το σώμα. Για τις δύο εργασίες, δόθηκε ένα εκπαιδευτικό σώμα από 3.834 tweets, καθώς και ένα σετ δοκιμών που περιελάμβανε 784 tweets. Οι κοινές μας εργασίες έλαβαν αιτήσεις από 43 ομάδες για τη δυαδική ταξινόμηση Εργασία Α και από 31 ομάδες για την πολυκλάση Εργασία Β. Οι υψηλότερες βαθμολογίες ταξινόμησης που έχουν ληφθεί και για τις δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες είναι αντίστοιχα και αποδεικνύουν ότι η λεπτόκοκκη ταξινόμηση ειρωνείας είναι πολύ πιο δύσκολη από την ανίχνευση δυαδικής ειρωνείας.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუნტი აჩვენებს პირველი გაყოფილი პარამეტრები იპონიის განახლების შესახებ: განახლებული tweet, ავტომატიკური ნაირადი ენის პროცესი სისტემები უნდა განსაზღვრება თუ არა tweet იპონიკური (A რამეტრები) და რო იპონიკური ტივიტები იყენებულია, რომელიც იპონიის შესახებ დაკავშირებული hashtags (ან. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) და შემდეგ მანქანიურად იყენებულია, რომელიც კოპოსში სიმაღლე მინუსიზებლად. მონაცემების გაყოფილი წინ, ჰექტაქტები, რომლებიც გამოყენებულია ტვიტების კოპუსიდან გადასტანა. ორივე დავალებისთვის, 3 834 tweets-ის კოპუსი, და 784 tweets-ის ტესტის კოპუსი იყო. ჩვენი საზოგადოებული დავალებები მიიღეთ 43 ჯგუფიკაციის A და 31 ჯგუფიკაციის მრატიკლასის B დავალებისთვის მომხმარება. ორივე საზოგადოებისთვის მიიღეთ უფრო მეტი კლასიფიკაციის მონაცემები არის F1= 0,71 და F1= 0,51 და გამოჩვენება, რომ საზოგადოებული თონიის კლასიფიკაცია', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta il primo compito condiviso sul rilevamento dell'ironia: dato un tweet, i sistemi automatici di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale dovrebbero determinare se il tweet è ironico (Task A) e quale tipo di ironia (se presente) viene espressa (Task B). I tweet ironici sono stati raccolti utilizzando hashtag legati all'ironia (cioè #ironia, #sarcasmo, #not) e successivamente sono stati annotati manualmente per ridurre al minimo la quantità di rumore nel corpus. Prima di distribuire i dati, gli hashtag utilizzati per raccogliere i tweet sono stati rimossi dal corpus. Per entrambi i compiti è stato fornito un corpus di formazione di 3.834 tweet, così come un set di test contenente 784 tweet. I nostri compiti condivisi hanno ricevuto contributi da 43 squadre per la classificazione binaria Task A e da 31 squadre per la classificazione multiclasse Task B. I punteggi più alti ottenuti per entrambe le sottoattività sono rispettivamente F1= 0.71 e F1= 0.51 e dimostrano che la classificazione dell'ironia a grana fine è molto più impegnativa del rilevamento dell'ironia binaria.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз иронияны анықтау үшін бірінші ортақтастырылған тапсырманы көрсетеді: tweet, автоматты түрді тілді өңдеу жүйелері туралы tweet- тің ирониялық (Тапсырма A) және қай ирониялық түрі (келесі болса) анықтайды (Тапсы Ироникалық tweets айрониялық хаттарды (т.е. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) қолданады және содан кейін корпустың дыбыс санын төмендету үшін қолмен белгіледі. Деректерді тарату алдында, tweets жинау үшін қолданылған хаттар корпустан алып тасталды. Екі тапсырма үшін 3 834 tweet бақылау корпус келтірілді, сондай-ақ 784 tweet бар сынақтар жиынында. Біздің ортақтастырылған тапсырмаларымыз A бинарлық тапсырмасының 43 тобынан жіберілген және B бірнеше класс тапсырмасының 31 тобынан жіберілген. Екі ішкі тапсырмасының ең жоғары тапсырмасы F1 = 0, 71 және F1 = 0, 51 деп көрсетілген жұмыс ирониялық тапсырмасының бинарлық ирони', 'mk': 'Овој весник ја претставува првата заедничка задача за идентификација на иронија: со оглед на твитот, автоматски системи за процес на природен јазик треба да одредат дали твитот е ироничен (задача А) и кој тип на иронија (ако постои) е изразен (задача Б). The ironic tweets were collected using irony-related hashtags (i.e. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) and were subsequently manually annotated to minimise the amount of noise in the corpus.  Пред дистрибуцијата на податоците, хаштаговите кои беа користени за собирање на твитовите беа отстранети од корпусот. За двете задачи беше обезбеден тренинг корпус од 3.834 твитови, како и тестот со 784 твитови. Нашите заеднички задачи добија поднесувања од 43 тимови за бинарната класификација задача А и од 31 тимови за мултикласичната задача Б. Највисоките оценки за класификација добиени за двете подзадачи се односно F1= 0,71 и F1= 0,51 и демонстрираат дека фината класификација на иронија е многу потешка отколку бинарната иронија детектива.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiama pirmoji bendra ironijos nustatymo užduotis: atsižvelgiant į tweet ą, automatinės natūralios kalbos apdorojimo sistemos turėtų nustatyti, ar tweetas yra ironiškas (A užduotis) ir kokio tipo ironija (jei yra) išreiškiama (B užduotis). Ironiniai tweetai buvo surinkti naudojant ironijai susijusius hashtagus (t. y. #ironiją, #sarkazmą, #ne) ir vėliau buvo rankiniu būdu užrašyti, kad būtų kuo mažiau triukšmo kūne. Prieš skirstant duomenis iš korpuso buvo pašalinti hashtagai, kurie buvo naudojami tweetams surinkti. For both tasks, a training corpus of 3,834 tweets was provided, as well as a test set containing 784 tweets.  Our shared tasks received submissions from 43 teams for the binary classification Task A and from 31 teams for the multiclass Task B. The highest classification scores obtained for both subtasks are respectively F1= 0.71 and F1= 0.51 and demonstrate that fine-grained irony classification is much more challenging than binary irony detection.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan tugas terkongsi pertama mengenai pengesan ironi: diberikan tweet, sistem pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi automatik patut menentukan sama ada tweet adalah ironi (Tugas A) dan jenis ironi (jika ada) yang diungkapkan (Tugas B). Tweets ironik dikumpulkan menggunakan hashtag berkaitan ironi (iaitu #ironi, #sarkasm, #tidak) dan kemudian dicatat secara manual untuk minimumkan jumlah bunyi dalam mayat. Sebelum mengedarkan data, hashtag yang digunakan untuk mengumpulkan tweet telah dibuang dari korpus. Untuk kedua-dua tugas, korpus latihan 3,834 tweet diberikan, serta set ujian yang mengandungi 784 tweet. Tugas berkongsi kami menerima penghantaran dari 43 pasukan untuk kelasukan binari Tugas A dan dari 31 pasukan untuk Tugas berkelas berbilang B. Skor kelasukan tertinggi yang diperoleh untuk kedua-dua subtasken adalah secara bertindih F1= 0.71 dan F1= 0.51 dan menunjukkan kelasukan ironi yang bersinar baik lebih mencabar daripada pengesan ironi binari.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta l-ewwel kompitu kondiviż dwar id-detezzjoni tal-ironija: meta wieħed iqis tweet, is-sistemi awtomatiċi tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali għandhom jiddeterminaw jekk it-tweet huwiex ironiku (Kompitu A) u liema tip ta’ ironija (jekk hemm) hija espressa (Kompitu B). It-tweets ironiċi nġabru bl-użu ta’ hashtags relatati mal-ironija (jiġifieri #ironija, #sarkazmu, #mhux) u sussegwentement ġew annotati manwalment biex jitnaqqas l-ammont ta’ storbju fil-korpus. Qabel id-distribuzzjoni tad-dejta, il-hashtags li ntużaw għall-ġbir tat-tweets tneħħew mill-korpus. għa ż-żewġ kompiti, ġie pprovdut korpus ta’ taħriġ ta’ 3,834 tweets, kif ukoll sett ta’ testijiet li fih 784 tweets. Il-kompiti kondiviżi tagħna rċevew sottomissjonijiet minn 43 tim għall-Klassifikazzjoni Binarja Kompitu A u minn 31 tim għall-Kompitu B multiklassi. L-ogħla punteġġi tal-klassifikazzjoni miksuba għaż-żewġ sottomistoqsijiet huma rispettivament F1= 0.71 u F1= 0.51 u juru li l-klassifikazzjoni tal-ironja b’ħbub irfinat hija ħafna aktar sfida milli d-detezzjoni tal-ironja binarja.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ജോലിയെ പരിഹാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു: ഒരു ടൂട്ടിയില്\u200d തന്നെ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം സ്വാഭ പരിഹാസപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഹാഷ്ടാഗുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പരിഹാസപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു (#irony, #sarcasm, #അല്ല) പിന്നീട് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിലെ ശ Prior to distributing the data, hashtags that were used to collect the tweets were removed from the corpus.  രണ്ട് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും, 3,834 ട്രെയിന്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പ് നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു, 784 ട്രെയിറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉള്ള പരീക്ഷണസെറ്റും. ഞങ്ങളുടെ പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലികള്\u200d 43 ടീമില്\u200d നിന്നും ബൈനര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ക്ലാസ് ടാസ്ക് ബിയില്\u200d നിന്നും 31 ടീമില്\u200d നിന്നും കീഴടങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു സബ്ട്ടോസിന്റെയും ഏറ്റവും ഉയര്\u200dത്തപ്പെട്ട ക്ലാസ്പോര്\u200dസ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас галзуу тогтоохын тулд анхны хуваалтын ажлыг тайлбарладаг: tweet, автоматик байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх систем нь tweet нь галзуу (Task A) болон ямар төрлийн галзуу (хэрвээ байвал) илэрхийлэгддэг вэ гэдгийг тодорхойлж чадна. Ироник tweets нь галзуу холбоотой хэлбэрээр цуглуулсан (т.е. #галзуу, #sarcasm, #not) ба дараагийн дараа нь корпус дахь чимээгүй хэмжээ багасгах боломжтой болсон. Өгөгдлийг хуваалцахаас өмнө tweets цуглуулахын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн хашгийг корпус гаргасан. Хоёр даалгаварын тулд 3.834 tweet-ын сургалтын корпус болон 784 tweet-ын туршилтын багц хангагдсан. Бидний хуваалтын ажиллагаас 43 багтаа хоёр дахь дахь дахь ажиллагааны А болон олон класс B дахь 31 багтаа дахь дахь дахь дахь дахь дахь дахь дахь хэмжээсүүд нь F1 = 0,71 болон F1 = 0,51 гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă prima sarcină comună privind detectarea ironiei: având în vedere un tweet, sistemele automate de procesare a limbajului natural ar trebui să determine dacă tweet-ul este ironic (Task A) și ce tip de ironie (dacă există) este exprimată (Task B). Tweet-urile ironice au fost colectate folosind hashtag-uri legate de ironie (adică #ironie, #sarcasm, #not) și ulterior au fost adnotate manual pentru a minimiza cantitatea de zgomot din corp. Înainte de distribuirea datelor, hashtagurile care au fost folosite pentru colectarea tweeturilor au fost eliminate din corpus. Pentru ambele sarcini, a fost furnizat un corpus de instruire de 3.834 tweet-uri, precum și un set de test conținând 784 tweet-uri. Sarcinile noastre partajate au primit trimiteri de la 43 de echipe pentru clasificarea binară Task A și de la 31 de echipe pentru clasificarea multiclass Task B. Cele mai mari scoruri de clasificare obținute pentru ambele subactivități sunt F1= 0.71 și F1= 0.51 și demonstrează că clasificarea ironiei fine este mult mai provocatoare decât detectarea ironiei binare.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono pierwsze wspólne zadanie dotyczące wykrywania ironii: biorąc pod uwagę tweet, automatyczne systemy przetwarzania języka naturalnego powinny określić, czy tweet jest ironiczny (zadanie A) i jaki rodzaj ironii (jeśli istnieje) jest wyrażony (zadanie B). Ironiczne tweety zostały zebrane za pomocą hashtagów związanych z ironią (tj. #irony, #sarkazm, #not), a następnie ręcznie adnotacjonowane, aby zminimalizować ilość hałasu w korpusie. Przed rozpowszechnieniem danych z korpusu usuwano hashtagi używane do zbierania tweetów. Do obu zadań dostarczono korpus szkoleniowy 3,834 tweetów, a także zestaw testowy zawierający 784 tweety. Nasze wspólne zadania otrzymały zgłoszenia od 43 zespołów do klasyfikacji binarnej Zadanie A oraz od 31 zespołów dla wieloklasowych Zadania B. Najwyższe wyniki klasyfikacji uzyskane dla obu podzadań to odpowiednio F1= 0.71 i F1= 0.51 i pokazują, że klasyfikacja drobnoziarnistej ironii jest znacznie trudniejsza niż wykrywanie ironii binarnej.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser den første delte oppgåva ved ironisk oppdaging: gitt eit tweet, automatisk naturspråksbehandlingssystemet bør bestemme om tweet er ironisk (oppgåve A) og kva type ironisk (viss det er noko) vert uttrykt (oppgåve B). Ironiske tweeter vart samla med ironiske hashtag (t.d. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) og så vart manuelt oppmerkte for å minimera støymengda i korpusen. Før du distribuerer data, vert hashtagane som vert bruka til å samla tweetene fjerna frå korpusen. For begge oppgåver vart oppgitt ei øvingskorpus med 3 834 tweet, og ein testsett med 784 tweet. Dei delte oppgåvene våre motteke oppføringar frå 43 grupper for den binære klassifikasjonskolasseringsoppgåva A og frå 31 grupper for multiklassesoppgåva B. Den høgste klassifikasjonskolaren som får for begge understillingar er F1 = 0,71 og F1 = 0,51, og demonstrerer at fingrenserte ironsklassifikasjon er mykje vanskeleg enn binære ironisk oppdaging.', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu ka muujiyaa shaqada ugu horeeyay ee lagu qeybiyay fikradda: haddii la siiyo tweetka, waxaa haboon in lagu ogaado nidaamka baaritaanka afka asalka ah in twitterku uu yahay ironic (shaqo A) iyo nooca ironiska (haddii kale) la muujiyo (shaqo B). Twitteetka ironicka waxaa lagu soo ururiyey isticmaalka alaabta la xiriira irony (tusaale. #irony, #sarkasm, #na) waxaana loo isticmaalay si ay ugu yaraato qaylada gubashada. Inta aan macluumaadka kala qaybinin, waxaa laga qaaday alaabta shabakada lagu isticmaalay in la soo ururiyo tweetka. Shaqooyinka labadooda waxaa lagu bixiyaa koox waxbarasho oo ah 3,834 tweeteed iyo koob imtixaan oo ku yaal 784 twitter. Shaqooyinkayadii la qaybsaday waxay ka heleen sujuyin ka mid ah 43 koox ka mid ah qasnadda labaad A iyo 31 koox oo ka mid ah shaqo qasab B. Xirfaha ugu sarreeya ee labada shaqaalaha lagu helo waa qeyb ahaan F1= 0.71 iyo F1= 0.51 waxaana muujiyaa in fasalka jimicsiga lagu qabtay ay ka dhibaato badan tahay baaritaanka labaad.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar den första gemensamma uppgiften om ironidetektering: Med en tweet bör automatiska system för naturlig språkbehandling avgöra om tweeten är ironisk (uppgift A) och vilken typ av ironi (om någon) som uttrycks (uppgift B). De ironiska tweeten samlades in med ironirelaterade hashtaggar (dvs #ironi, #sarkasm, #not) och kommenterades därefter manuellt för att minimera mängden brus i korpusen. Innan datan distribuerades togs hashtaggar som användes för att samla in tweets bort från korpusen. För båda uppgifterna tillhandahölls en träningskorps med 3 834 tweets, samt en testuppsättning med 784 tweets. Våra delade uppgifter mottog bidrag från 43 lag för den binära klassificeringen Uppgift A och från 31 lag för flerklassens Uppgift B. De högsta klassificeringspoängen som erhållits för båda delaktiviteterna är F1= 0,71 respektive F1= 0,51 och visar att finkornig ironiklassificering är mycket mer utmanande än binär ironi detektering.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja prvi zajednièki zadatak o ironiji otkrivanju: s obzirom na tweet, automatski prirodni sistem obrađivanja jezika trebalo bi utvrditi da li je tweet ironičan (zadatak A) i koji je tip ironija (ako ima) izražen (zadatak B). Ironičke tweete su sakupljene sa ironičkim hashtagama (tj. #ironija, #sarkazam, #not) i nakon toga su se ručno annotirale kako bi smanjile količinu buke u korpusu. Prije raspodjele podataka, hashtage koje su korišćene za sakupljanje tweeta su uklonjene iz korpusa. Za obe zadatke, pružen je trening korpus od 3.834 tweets, kao i test set koji sadrži 784 tweets. Naši zajednički zadatak je dobio podatke od 43 timova za binarnu klasifikaciju zadatak A i od 31 timova za multiklasni zadatak B. Najveći rezultati klasifikacije dobijeni za obe podatke su odgovarajući F1 = 0,71 i F1 = 0,51 i pokazuju da je finozgrađena ironija klasifikacija mnogo izazovnija od binarne ironija.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්ත පෙන්වන්නේ අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාව පද්ධතිය පෙන්වන්න: ට්විට් එකක්, ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය භාෂාව පද්ධතිය සැකසුම් විශ්ව අයිරෝනික ට්විට්ස් එක්කම් වුනා අයිරෝනි සම්බන්ධ හැස්ටැග් වලින් (ඉතින්, #irony, #sarcasm, #not) සම්බන්ධ වුනා ඒ වගේම පස්සේ අයිරෝනික වි දත්ත විතරගන්න කලින්, ට්විට් එක්ක ගන්න පුළුවන් හැස්ටැග් වලින් කෝපුස් වලින් පිටවුනා. දෙන්නම වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්, 3,834 ට්වීට් වල ස්ථානයක් තියෙනවා, 784 ට්වීට් වල පරීක්ෂා සැට් එකක් තියෙනවා. අපේ සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් ලැබුණු කණ්ඩායම් 43 කණ්ඩායම් වෙනුවෙන් බායිනාරි වැඩක් A වලින් 31 කණ්ඩායම් වෙනුවෙන් වැඩක් B වලින්. The Highest classification scores got for both subtask are referenvely F1= 0.71 and F1= 0.51 and show that Fine-cornned irony classification is more challengy', 'ur': 'This paper presents the first shared task on irony detection: given a tweet, automatic natural language processing systems should determine whether the tweet is ironic (Task A) and which type of irony (if any) is expressed (Task B). ایرونیک ٹیوٹ (یعنی #irony, #sarcasm, #not) کے استعمال سے جمع کئے گئے اور اس کے بعد کورپوس میں آواز کی مقدار کم کرنے کے لئے مطلع کئے گئے۔ ڈیٹا تقسیم کرنے سے پہلے، ٹویٹوں کو جمع کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا تھا، ہٹاگ کورپوس سے ہٹا دیئے گئے۔ دونوں کاموں کے لئے، 3.834 ٹویٹ کی تربینٹ کورپوس کی تربینٹ دی گئی تھی، اور 784 ٹویٹ کے ساتھ ایک امتحان مجموعہ کی تھی. ہمارے مشترک ٹیموں نے 43 ٹیموں سے ڈیسم لیا تھا جو دو ٹیموں کے لئے دو ٹیموں کے لئے اور 31 ٹیموں سے ملتی کلاس ٹیموں کے لئے۔', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் முதல் பங்கிடப்பட்ட பணியை irony கண்டுபிடிப்பதில் கூடுகிறது: ஒரு tweet கொடுக்கப்பட்டால், தானாகவே இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டு அமைப்பு வேடிக்கையான துவங்குகள் சேகரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது (#irony, #sarcasm, #இல்) தகவல்களை பங்கிடுவதற்கு முன், தொடர்புகளை சேகரிக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ள ஹாஷ்டாக்குகள் கார்ப்ஸிலிருந்து நீக் இரண்டு பணிகளுக்கும், 3,834 டுவிட்டுக்கான பயிற்சி குறியீடு வழங்கப்பட்டது, மற்றும் 784 டிவிட்டர் உள்ள சோதனை அமைப்பு. எங்கள் பகிர்ந்த பணிகள் 43 வகுப்பு பணி A மற்றும் பல வகுப்பு பணி B க்கு 31 குழுக்களிலிருந்து ஒப்புக்கொள்ளப்பட்டுள்ளது. இருவகுப்புகளுக்கும் உயர்ந்த வகுப்பு மதிப்புகள் F1= 0. 71 மற்றும் F1= 0. 51 மற்றும் இரு', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz ironi aniqlash uchun birinchi birinchi birinchi ishni koʻrsatiladi: tweeti bilan avtomatik tilni boshqarish tizimini avtomatik foydalanish tizimini aniqlashi kerak, xabar A (vazifa A) va qanday qismi (agar bir qanday) koʻrsatiladi (Vazifa B). Aniqlik Twitterlar cheksiz bog'liq hashtaglar (m.eks. #ironi, #sarkasm, #emas) yordamida olingan va keyin qo'lbola'yxatda qo'lbola qo'llangan. Prior to distributing the data, hashtags that were used to collect the tweets were removed from the corpus.  Bu ikkita vazifalar uchun 3,834 tweetining trening kopusi va 784 tweeti bilan bir sinov turli. Bizning birlashtirilgan vazifalamiz 43 guruhdan birinchi darajalashtirish vazifa A va bir necha darajada Vazifa B uchun 31 guruhdan imkoniyatlar qabul qilindi. Bu ikkita vazifalar uchun eng yuqori darajalar F1= 0. 71 va F1= 0. 51 va ko'paytirilgan kemani darajasini bir xil aniqlashdan ko'proq qismi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề nghị một nhiệm vụ chia sẻ đầu tiên về việc phát hiện mỉa mai: với một cái tweet, hệ thống xử lý ngôn ngữ tự động sẽ quyết định xem tweet có phải là mỉa mai hay không (Task A) và kiểu mỉa mai (nếu có) được phát biểu (Task B). The mỉa mai twitter đã được thu thập bằng các loại Hasit liên quan đến sự trớ trêu (v.d.\\ 35; mỉa mai, và đã được ghi chú bằng tay để tối thiểu số lượng nhiễu trong tập thể. Trước khi phát dữ liệu, các dấu vân tay được dùng để thu các tweet đã bị loại khỏi tập đoàn. Với cả hai nhiệm vụ, đã được cung cấp một tập tin trên Twitter của 3834, cũng như một tập thử nghiệm chứa tweet của 784. Những việc chia sẻ của chúng tôi đã nhận được phần mềm của các đội 43 for the binary classification Task A và thuộc đội 31l for the multiglass Task B. The highest classification điểm được lấy cho cả hai phần phụ là F1=. 0.71 và F1=. 0.51 và showy that fine-gramined Trớ ky classification is much much much more Thách thức hơn việc xác định các nhị trớ trêu.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя първата споделена задача за откриване на ирония: при дадения туит автоматичните системи за обработка на естествения език трябва да определят дали туитът е ироничен (задача А) и какъв тип ирония (ако има такава) е изразена (задача Б). Ироничните туитове са събрани с помощта на свързани с ирония хаштагове (т.е. #ирония, #сарказъм, #не) и впоследствие са ръчно анотирани, за да се сведе до минимум количеството шум в корпуса. Преди разпространението на данните, хаштаговете, използвани за събиране на туитовете, бяха премахнати от корпуса. За двете задачи беше предоставен обучителен корпус от 3 834 туита, както и тестен комплект, съдържащ 784 туита. Нашите споделени задачи получиха предложения от 43 екипа за двоичната класификация Задача А и от 31 екипа за многокласовата Задача Б. Най-високите класификационни оценки, получени за двете подзадачи, са съответно Най-високите класификационни оценки, получени за двете подзадачи, са съответно Формула = 0,71 и Формула = 0,51 и демонстрират, че фината класификация на иронията е много по-предизвикателна от откриването на двоична ирония.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja prvi zajednički zadatak o otkrivanju ironija: s obzirom na tweet, automatski prirodni sustavi obrađivanja jezika trebali bi utvrditi je li tweet ironičan (zadatak A) i kakva vrsta ironija (ako je bilo) izražena (zadatak B). Ironičke tweete su sakupljene s ironičkim hashtagama (tj. #ironija, #sarkazam, #not) i nakon toga su se ručno navodile kako bi smanjili količinu buke u korpusu. Prije raspodjele podataka, hashtage koje su korišćene za sakupljanje tweeta su uklonile iz korpusa. Za obe zadatke, pružen je obučni korpus od 3 834 tweets, kao i test set koji sadrži 784 tweets. Naši zajednički zadatak dobili su podatke od 43 timova za binarnu klasifikaciju zadatak A i od 31 timova za multiklasni zadatak B. Najviši rezultati klasifikacije dobiveni za oba podataka su odgovarajući F1 = 0,71 i F1 = 0,51 i pokazuju da je finozgrađena ironija klasifikacija mnogo izazovnija od binarnog otkrivanja ironija.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt die erste gemeinsame Aufgabe zur Ironie-Erkennung vor: Bei einem Tweet sollten automatische natürliche Sprachverarbeitungssysteme bestimmen, ob der Tweet ironisch ist (Aufgabe A) und welche Art von Ironie (falls vorhanden) ausgedrückt wird (Aufgabe B). Die ironischen Tweets wurden unter Verwendung ironie-bezogener Hashtags (d.h. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) gesammelt und anschließend manuell kommentiert, um das Rauschen im Korpus zu minimieren. Vor der Verbreitung der Daten wurden Hashtags, mit denen die Tweets gesammelt wurden, aus dem Korpus entfernt. Für beide Aufgaben wurde ein Trainingskorpus aus 3.834 Tweets sowie ein Testset mit 784 Tweets bereitgestellt. Unsere geteilten Aufgaben erhielten Einreichungen von 43-Teams für die binäre Klassifikation Task A und von 31-Teams für die Multiklasse Task B. Die höchsten Klassifikationswerte für beide Teilaufgaben sind F1= 0.71 und F1= 0.51 und zeigen, dass feinkörnige Ironie-Klassifizierung viel anspruchsvoller ist als binäre Ironie-Erkennung.', 'ko': '본고는 풍자 검출에 관한 첫 번째 공유 임무를 소개했다. 추문을 지정하고 자동 자연 언어 처리 시스템은 추문이 풍자(퀘스트 a)인지 어떤 유형의 풍자(있으면)를 표현하는지 확인해야 한다(퀘스트 B).이러한 풍자 추문은 풍자와 관련된 라벨(즉 #irony, #sarcasm, #not)을 사용하여 수집한 다음에 수동 주석을 해서 어료 라이브러리의 소음을 최대한 줄인다.데이터를 나누어 주기 전에 자료 라이브러리에서 추문을 수집하는 데 사용되는 라벨을 삭제했다.이 두 가지 임무에 대해 3834개의 추문을 포함하는 훈련 자료 라이브러리와 784개의 추문을 포함하는 테스트 집합을 제공했다.우리의 공유 임무는 43개 팀이 제출한 2진법 분류 임무 A와 31개 팀이 제출한 여러 종류의 임무 B를 받았다. 두 개의 하위 임무가 얻은 최고 분류 점수는 각각 F1=0.71과 F1=0.51로 세립도 반어 분류가 2진법 반어 검측보다 도전적이라는 것을 보여준다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan tugas pertama berbagi tentang deteksi ironi: diberikan tweet, sistem proses bahasa alami otomatis harus menentukan apakah tweet ironi (Tugas A) dan jenis ironi (jika ada) yang diungkapkan (Tugas B). Tweets ironis dikumpulkan menggunakan hashtag terkait ironi (i.e. #ironi, #sarkasme, #tidak) dan kemudian secara manual dicatat untuk mengurangi jumlah suara di mayat. Sebelum mendistribusikan data, hashtag yang digunakan untuk mengumpulkan tweet dihapus dari korpus. Untuk kedua tugas, sebuah korpus pelatihan dari 3.834 tweet diberikan, serta set tes yang mengandung 784 tweet. Tugas berbagi kami menerima pengiriman dari 43 tim untuk klasifikasi binari Task A dan dari 31 tim untuk multikelas Task B. Skor klasifikasi tertinggi yang diperoleh untuk kedua subtasks adalah secara harfiah F1= 0,71 dan F1= 0,51 dan menunjukkan bahwa klasifikasi ironi gandum jauh lebih menantang daripada deteksi ironi binari.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha kazi ya kwanza inayosambazwa na uchunguzi wa kejeli: kwa kutumia twiti, mfumo wa utaratibu wa lugha za asili unapaswa kuamua ikiwa twiti hiyo ni ya kejeli (Kazi A) na aina gani ya kejeli (kama yeyote) inaonyesha (Kazi B). Twiti hizo za kejeli zilikusanyika kwa kutumia alama ishara zinazohusiana na kejeli (yaani. #irony, #sarcasm, #na) na baadae zilichunguzwa kwa manufaa ili kupunguza idadi ya sauti katika makampuni hayo. Kabla ya kusambaza taarifa hizo, alama ishara zilizotumiwa kukusanya twiti hizo ziliondolewa kutoka kwenye makampuni hayo. Kwa kazi zote mbili, makampuni ya mafunzo ya twiti 3,834 ilitolewa, pamoja na seti ya jaribio yenye twiti 784. Our shared tasks received submissions from 43 teams for the binary classification Task A and from 31 teams for the multiclass Task B. The highest classification scores obtained for both subtasks are respectively F1= 0.71 and F1= 0.51 and demonstrate that fine-grained irony classification is much more challenging than binary irony detection.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ اولین کار مشترک در مورد شناسایی آهنگ را نشان می دهد: به عنوان یک تویت، سیستم\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی خودکار باید تصمیم بگیرد آیا تویت آهنگ است (Task A) و کدام نوع آهنگ (اگر وجود دارد) استفاده می\u200cشود (Task B). Tweets ironic were collected using irony-related hashtags (i.e. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) and subsequently were manually annotated to minimize the amount of noise in the corpus. قبل از توزیع داده\u200cها، هشتگال\u200cهایی که برای جمع کردن توئیت\u200cها استفاده شده\u200cاند از کورپوس حذف شده\u200cاند. برای هر دو وظیفه، یک کورپوس آموزشی از ۳.834 تویت، همچنین یک مجموعه آزمایش با 784 تویت است. وظیفه\u200cهای مشترک ما از 43 تیم برای وظیفه\u200cی classification A و از 31 تیم برای وظیفه\u200cی چند کلاس B تحویل گرفته\u200cاند. بالاترین امتیاز classification obtained for both subtasks respectively F1= 0.71 و F1= 0.51 و نشان می\u200cدهند که classification of irony fined is much more challenging than binary irony detection.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz gijesi tapylmadykda ilkinji bölünen zady görkezýär: netijesi berildi, otomatik tebigy diller işleýän sistemalar tweet ironikiýa (Taýgyn A) we hangy döwüregiň (eger biri bolsa) a ýdylýandygyny bejermeli. Ironik tweetler daly gürrüňli hashtatlar ulanyp ýygnanypdyr (diýmek. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) we soňra korpusyň gürrüňin i azaltmak üçin elleri duýulýardy. Maglumatlary bölmekden öňinçä, tweepleri toplamak üçin ullanýan hashtatlar korpusdan çykardy. Iki zadyň üçin 3.834 tweet sanynda, 784 tweet içeren test setigi hem bilim taýýarlandy. Biziň paylaşyk görevlerimiz 43 topardan ikinji klasifikasyýa Taýsy A we 31 topardan multiklas Taýsy B üçin süýtgetmeler aldy. Iki süýtgetmek üçin iň ýokary klasifikasyýa sanlary diňe F1= 0.71 we F1= 0.51 we ol gyzgynly kirli klasifikasyýanyň ikinji döwürmeginden has gaty kynçylykdyr.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel die eerste gedeelde taak voor ironiese beskrywing: gegewe 'n tweet, automaties natuurlike taal verwerking stelsels moet bepaal of die tweet ironiese is (Taak A) en wat tipe ironiese (indien enige) uitgevoer is (Taak B). Die ironiese tweete is versamel deur ironie-verwante hashtags (t.d. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) en daarna is aangekom om die hoeveelheid ruis in die korpus te minimiseer. Voordat die data te verdeel, het die hashtags wat gebruik word om die tweets te samel is van die korpus verwyder. Vir beide opdragte was 'n oefening korpus van 3,834 tweets verskaf, en ook 'n toets stel wat 784 tweets bevat. Ons gedeelde taak ontvang onderskrifte van 43 teame vir die binêre klasifikasie Opdrag A en van 31 teame vir die multiklase Opdrag B. Die hoogste klasifikasie aantal wat vir beide onderskrifte ontvang is, is respectively F1= 0.71 en F1= 0.51 en wys dat fyn-graad ironie klasifikasie baie meer gelukkig is as binêre ironie-ontdekking.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የመጀመሪያውን የኢንተርኔት ማግኘት ስራ ያሳያል፤ በትዊት የተሰጠ፣ የፍጥረቱ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ሲስተካከል፣ ትዊተሩን የironis (ስራ A) እና የትኛው ዓይነት የirony (ማንኛውም ቢሆን) የሚታየው (ስራ B) ሲሆን ያረጋግጣል፡፡ የኢንተርኔት Tweets በፌስቡክ ላይ የተሰበሰቡ (አ. #irony, #sarkasm, #አይደለም) የድምፅ ድምፅ በቁጥር ውስጥ ያነሳቅስ ዘንድ በእጃቸው ተደብቀዋል፡፡ Prior to distributing the data, hashtags that were used to collect the tweets were removed from the corpus.  ለሁለቱም ስራ 3,834 ትዊተሮች የሞክራዊ ኮፓስ እና 784 Tweets የተሰኘ የሞክራዊ ደረጃ ተሰጥቷል፡፡ የተካፈሉት ስራቶቻችን ከ43 ወገኖች የብናዊ ግንኙነት ስራ አ እና ከ31 የክፍል ደረጃዎች ለስራ B ጥያቄ ተቀብለዋል። ለሁለቱም ስራዎች ከፍተኛ ክፍሎች F1= 0.71 እና F1= 0.51 እና የተመሳሳይ የirony ግንኙነት ከሀይራ የirony ግንኙነት ይልቅ አብልጠዋል፡፡', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer den første fælles opgave om ironidetektering: Med et tweet bør automatiske systemer til behandling af naturligt sprog afgøre, om tweetet er ironisk (opgave A), og hvilken type ironi (hvis nogen) der udtrykkes (opgave B). De ironiske tweets blev indsamlet ved hjælp af ironirelaterede hashtags (dvs. #ironi, #sarkasme, #not) og blev efterfølgende manuelt noteret for at minimere mængden af støj i korpuset. Før dataene distribueres, blev hashtags, der blev brugt til at indsamle tweets, fjernet fra korpuset. Til begge opgaver blev der leveret et træningskorpus på 3.834 tweets samt et testsæt med 784 tweets. Vores delte opgaver modtog indsendelser fra 43 hold til den binære klassifikation Task A og fra 31 hold til flerklasse Task B. De højeste klassifikationspoint opnået for begge underopgaver er henholdsvis F1= 0,71 og F1= 0,51 og viser, at finkornet ironi klassificering er meget mere udfordrende end binær ironi detektering.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert de eerste gedeelde taak over ironie detectie: gegeven een tweet, moeten automatische natuurlijke taalverwerkingssystemen bepalen of de tweet ironisch is (Task A) en welk type ironie (indien aanwezig) wordt uitgedrukt (Task B). De ironische tweets werden verzameld met behulp van ironie-gerelateerde hashtags (d.w.z. #irony, #sarcasme, #not) en vervolgens handmatig geannoteerd om de hoeveelheid ruis in het corpus te minimaliseren. Voordat de gegevens werden verspreid, werden hashtags die werden gebruikt om de tweets te verzamelen uit het corpus verwijderd. Voor beide taken werd een trainingscorpus van 3.834 tweets verstrekt, evenals een testset met 784 tweets. Onze gedeelde taken ontvingen inzendingen van 43-teams voor de binaire classificatie Taak A en van 31-teams voor de multiklasse Taak B. De hoogste classificatiescores voor beide subtaken zijn respectievelijk F1= 0.71 en F1= 0.51 en tonen aan dat fijnkorrelige ironie classificatie veel uitdagender is dan binaire ironie detectie.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি বিদ্রূপ সনাক্তির উপর প্রথম শেয়ার কর্ম উপস্থাপন করেছে: টুইট প্রদান করা হয়েছে, স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া সিস্টেম নির্ধারণ করা উচিত যে টুইট বিদ্রোহী  এই বিদ্রূপ টুইট ব্যবহার করে হাস্যকর হ্যাশট্যাগ ব্যবহার করে সংগ্রহ করা হয়েছে (যেমন #irony, #sarcasm, #নয়) এবং এর পরে করপাসের কণ্ঠস্বর কমিয়ে দেয়ার জন্য হ্যাশট্যাগ নিয় Prior to distributing the data, hashtags that were used to collect the tweets were removed from the corpus.  দুটো কাজের জন্য ৩,৮৩৪ টুইটের প্রশিক্ষণ কোর্পাস প্রদান করা হয়েছে এবং ৭৮৪ টুইটের মধ্যে একটি পরীক্ষা সেট প্রদান করা হয়েছে। আমাদের শেয়ার কর্মগুলো বাইনারি শ্রেণীবিভাগ টাস্ক এ এবং মাল্টিক্লাস টাক্স বির জন্য ৩১ টিম থেকে প্রদান করা হয়েছে। উভয় সাবটাক্সের জন্য সবচেয়ে বেশী গ্রাফিকেশন স্কোর হচ্ছে এফ১= ০. ৭১ এবং এফ১= ০. ৫১', 'az': 'Bu kağıt ironi tanıdırmaq haqqında ilk paylaşılmış işi göstərir: tweet verilmiş, avtomatik təbiətli dil işləmə sistemləri tweet ironiki (Task A) və hansı ironi (if any) türünün ifadə ediləcəyini (Task B) müəyyən etməlidir. İronik twetlər ironi ilə bağlı hashtaqlar (məsələn, #irony, #sarcasm, #not) ilə birləşdirildi və sonra korpusdakı səslərin sayını azaltmaq üçün əlli olaraq bildirildi. Məlumatları dağıtmadan əvvəl, tweetləri toplamaq üçün istifadə edilən hashtaqlar korpusdan çıxarıldı. İki iş üçün 3 834 twet təhsil korpusu və 784 twet içərisində olan test seti təmin edildi. Bizim paylaşılmış işlərimiz ikili klasifikasyon Task A üçün 43 tərəfdən və çoxlu sınıf Task B üçün 31 tərəfdən istifadə edilmişdir. İkisi subtasklar üçün ən yüksək klasifikasyon nöqtələri müqayisədə F1= 0,71 və F1= 0,51 tərəflərinə istifadə edilmişdir və təmizlənmiş ironi klasifikasiyası ikili ironi tanıdıqdan daha çətin olduğunu göstərmişdir.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta la primera tasca compartida en la detecció de l'ironia: dada un tweet, els sistemes automàtics de processament de llenguatges naturals haurien de determinar si el tweet és irònic (tasca A) i quin tipus d'ironia (si hi ha) s'expressa (tasca B). The ironic tweets were collected using irony-related hashtags (i.e. #irony, #sarcasm, #not) and were subsequently manually annotated to minimise the amount of noise in the corpus.  Prior to distributing the data, hashtags that were used to collect the tweets were removed from the corpus.  For both tasks, a training corpus of 3,834 tweets was provided, as well as a test set containing 784 tweets.  Les nostres tasques compartides van rebre presentacions de 43 equips per la classificació binaria Task A i de 31 equips per la multiclasse Task B. Les puntuacions de classificació més grans obtenides per ambdues subtaskes són respectivament F1= 0,71 i F1= 0,51 i demostren que la classificació d'ironia fina és molt més difícil que la detecció d'ironia binaria.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja prvi zajednički zadatak o identifikaciji ironija: s obzirom na tweet, automatski prirodni sustavi obrade jezika trebali bi utvrditi da li je tweet ironičan (zadatak A) i koji je tip ironija (ako ima) izražen (zadatak B). Ironičke tweete su sakupljene s ironičkim hashtagama (tj. #ironija, #sarkazam, #not) i poslije su se ručno navodile kako bi smanjili količinu buke u korpusu. Prije raspodjele podataka, hashtage koje su korišćene za sakupljanje tweeta su uklonjene iz korpusa. Za obe zadatke je pružen trening korpus od 3.834 tweets, kao i test set koji sadrži 784 tweets. Naši zajednički zadatak je dobio podatke od 43 timova za binarnu klasifikaciju A i od 31 timova za multiklasni zadatak B. Najviši rezultati klasifikacije dobiveni za oba podatka su odgovarajući F1 = 0,71 i F1 = 0,51 i pokazuju da je finozgrađena ironija klasifikacija mnogo izazovnija od binarnog otkrivanja ironija.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis esitatakse esimene jagatud ülesanne iroonia tuvastamiseks: säutsu puhul peaksid looduskeele automaatsed töötlussüsteemid määrama, kas säutsu on irooniline (ülesanne A) ja millist tüüpi irooniat (kui ülesanne B) väljendatakse. Ironilised säutsud koguti irooniaga seotud hashtagede abil (st #iroonia, #sarkasm, #not) ja seejärel manuaalselt märgiti, et vähendada korpuse müra hulka. Enne andmete levitamist eemaldati säutsude kogumiseks kasutatud hashtagid korpusest. Mõlema ülesande jaoks pakuti 3 834 säutsu koolituskorpus ja 784 säutsu testikomplekt. Meie jagatud ülesanded said esitusi 43 meeskonnalt binaarse klassifitseerimise ülesande A jaoks ja 31 meeskonnalt mitmeklassilise ülesande B jaoks. Mõlema alamülesande puhul saadud kõrgeimad klassifitseerimisskoorid on vastavalt F1= 0,71 ja F1= 0,51 ning näitavad, et peeneteteraline iroonia klassifitseerimine on palju keerulisem kui binaarse iroonia tuvastamine.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է առաջին ընդհանուր հանձնարարությունը հեղինակության հայտնաբերման մասին: Թվիթի առնելով, ավտոմատիկ բնական լեզվի վերամշակման համակարգերը պետք է որոշեն, արդյոք թվիթին հեղինակություն է (Ա-հանձնարարություն) և ինչ տեսակ հեղինակ Իրոնիկ թվիթերը հավաքվեցին օգտագործելով հերոնիայի հետ կապված հաշաթեգներ (այսինքն, #հերոնիա, #սարկազմ, #ոչ) և հետո ձեռքով գրված էին մարմնի աղմուկի քանակը նվազեցնելու համար: Նախքան տվյալների տարածումը, թվիթերի հավաքածուն օգտագործվող հաշտակները հեռացվեցին մարմնից: Երկու խնդիրների համար տրամադրվել է 3,834 թվիթերի ուսուցման մարմին, ինչպես նաև 784 թվիթերի պարունակող փորձարկումներ: Մեր ընդհանուր առաջադրանքները ստացան 43 թիմերից ներկայացումներ երկարագույն դասակարգման A-ի և 31 թիմերից բազմադասակարգման B-ի համար։ Երկու ենթախնդիրների համար ստացված ամենաբարձր դասակարգման գնահատականները F1= 0.71 և F1= 0.51 են, և ցույց են տալիս, որ նրբագեղ իրոնիայի դասակարգման շատ ավելի դժվար է քան երկարագու', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje první sdílený úkol o detekci ironie: vzhledem k tweetu by automatické systémy zpracování přirozeného jazyka měly určit, zda je tweet ironický (Úkol A) a jaký typ ironie (pokud existuje) je vyjádřen (Úkol B). Ironické tweety byly shromážděny pomocí hashtagů souvisejících s ironií (tj. #irony, #sarkasmus, #not) a následně ručně anotovány, aby se minimalizovalo množství šumu v korpusu. Před distribucí dat byly z korpusu odstraněny hashtagy, které sloužily ke shromažďování tweetů. Pro obě úkoly byl poskytnut školicí korpus 3,834 tweetů a testovací sada obsahující 784 tweetů. Naše sdílené úkoly obdržely podání od 43 týmů pro binární klasifikaci Úkol A a od 31 týmů pro vícetřídní úkol Úkol B. Nejvyšší klasifikační skóre získané pro obě podúkoly jsou F1= 0.71 a F1= 0.51 a ukazují, že jemnozrnná klasifikace ironie je mnohem náročnější než detekce binární ironie.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään ensimmäinen jaettu tehtävä ironian havaitsemisesta: twiitin avulla automaattisten luonnollisen kielen käsittelyjärjestelmien tulisi määrittää, onko twiitti ironinen (tehtävä A) ja minkä tyyppinen ironia (jos sellainen) ilmaistaan (tehtävä B). Ironiset tweetit kerättiin ironiaan liittyvillä hashtageilla (esim. #ironia, #sarkasmi, #not) ja ne kirjoitettiin manuaalisesti korpusessa olevan kohinan minimoimiseksi. Ennen tietojen jakamista twiittien keräämiseen käytetyt hashtagit poistettiin korpusesta. Molempiin tehtäviin toimitettiin 3 834 tweetin koulutuskorpus sekä 784 tweetin testisarja. Yhteisiin tehtäviimme saatiin ehdotuksia 43 tiimiltä binaariluokitukseen tehtävään A ja 31 tiimiltä moniluokkaan tehtävään B. Molemmista alitehtävistä saadut korkeimmat luokituspisteet ovat F1 = 0,71 ja F1 = 0,51 ja osoittavat, että hienorakeinen ironialuokitus on paljon haastavampaa kuin binaariironian havaitseminen.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet detyrën e parë të përbashkët për zbulimin e ironisë: duke pasur parasysh një tweet, sistemet automatike të përdorimit të gjuhës natyrore duhet të përcaktojnë nëse tweeti është ironik (Task A) dhe cilat lloj ironisë (nëse ka) është shprehur (Task B). Tweetet ironike u mblodhën duke përdorur hashtage lidhur me ironinë (pra #ironi, #sarkazmi, #jo) dhe më pas u shënuan manualisht për të minimizuar sasinë e zhurmës në kufom. Para shpërndarjes së të dhënave, hashtags që u përdorën për të mbledhur tweetet u hoqën nga korpusi. Për të dy detyrat, u ofrua një korpus trajnimi prej 3,834 tweets si dhe një grup testimi që përmban 784 tweets. Detyrat tona të përbashkëta morën paraqitje nga 43 ekipe për klasifikimin binar Task A dhe nga 31 ekipe për Task B shumë klase. Punimet më të larta të klasifikimit të fituara për të dy subtasket janë respektivisht F1= 0.71 dhe F1= 0.51 dhe demonstrojnë se klasifikimi i ironisë së hollësishme është shumë më i vështirë se zbulimi i ironisë binare.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da aikin na farko da aka raba shi a kan gane jerin: ana ƙara wa'ura, ana ƙayyade system-zartar da harshen farat ɗaya, ya ƙayyade a ƙayyade kowane irin jerin (Tafiyar A) da wane irin jerin (idan an nuna aikin B). An samo Twitter na yin izgili da hashtagun haske masu husũma na izgili (misali #jerni,  #sarkasm,  #na) kuma aka yanyanka shi da hannun damu dõmin ya ƙara ƙaranci ko ƙaramin sauri cikin makarubin. Kabla da za'a raba data, sai aka goge hashtags waɗanda aka yi amfani da su sami jumuin-biyu daga korbas. Ga aikin dukansu, an ba da wata mafarin takarda na 3,834 watete, da kuma an sami wata jarrabo mai ƙunsa da 784 Twitter. Kirananmu da aka raba aikin mu daga jama'a 43 wa aikin mai jarraba aikin labari A da kuma daga jama'a 31 wa aikin aikin na mulki B. Kida kyauta mafi girma ya sãmu wa aikin dukansu F1= 0.71 da F1= 0.51 kuma ya nuna cewa, sifanci mai kyau na sarrafa jerin shine mafi ƙaranci daga ganin jerin labari.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena prva skupna naloga o odkrivanju ironije: glede na tvit bi morali sistemi avtomatske obdelave naravnega jezika določiti, ali je tvit ironičen (naloga A) in katera vrsta ironije (če obstaja) je izražena (naloga B). Ironični tweeti so bili zbrani z ironijo povezanimi hashtagi (tj. #ironija, #sarkazem, #ne) in so bili kasneje ročno označeni, da bi zmanjšali količino hrupa v korpusu. Pred distribucijo podatkov so bile iz korpusa odstranjene hashtage, ki so bile uporabljene za zbiranje tweetov. Za obe nalogi je bil zagotovljen korpus usposabljanja 3.834 tweetov in testni niz 784 tweetov. Naše skupne naloge so prejele prispevke 43 ekip za binarno klasifikacijo naloge A in 31 ekip za večrazredno nalogo B. Najvišja ocena klasifikacije, pridobljena za obe podopravili, sta F1 = 0,71 oziroma F1 = 0,51 in kažejo, da je drobnozrnata ironija veliko bolj zahtevna kot odkrivanje binarne ironije.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གནད་དོན་འཚོལ་བཤེར་དང་ཐོག་མའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་པོ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། འདྲ་བའི་ཤོག་བྱང་དེ་ཚོ་ནི་ས irony-related hashtags(དཔེར་ན། #irony, #sarcasm, #not)་བེད་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་ཡོད། དབུགས་སྡུད་འདི་ཚོ་བསྡུར་བྱེད་པའི་སྔོན་གྱི་མགོ་ཡིག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་། བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་ལས་བརྟན་པར་སྤྱད་ནས་དབུལ་གྱི་ཞལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་པ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་རེད། སྒྲུབ་གྱི་རྩིས་ཡོད་པའི་བརྟག་ Our shared tasks received submissions from 43 teams for the binary classification Task A and from 31 teams for the multiclass Task B. The highest classification scores obtained for both subtasks are respectively F1= 0.71 and F1= 0.51 and demonstrate that fine-grained irony classification is much more challenging than binary irony detection.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe sistem sing berarting maneh nang kebuturan irne: nyebutne kuwi tuet, sistem sing perusahaan nggunakake sistem automatik ing nggawe dilangan sistem sing bisa-bisa kuwi tiket is irne (task A) lan sewelakoe soko perusahaan (task B). Tulung sing nggawe Jejaring Awak dhéwé wis sepirksi dadi, hash-hash sing wis dipunangé kanggo nggambar tuwit sing nyimpen winih Daerah sing arep gawe, akeh cara nggawe 3,484 tuwit wis nyimpen, lan uga ujian sing nyimpen banget karo 584 tuwit. We share tasks been given Subjects from 31 bands for the binary category task A and from 31 bands for the multicategory task B. The top priority points available for all Subtasks are responsibly F1 = 0.75 and F1 = 0.31 and show that Fin-granted irny category is a long time chanelenging than binary irny detection.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג את המשימה הראשונה המשותפת על גילוי אירוניה: בהתחשב בטיוויט, מערכות מעבדת שפת טבעית אוטומטיות צריכות לקבוע אם הטיוויט אירוני (משימה A) ואיזה סוג של אירוניה (אם קיימת) מוביעה (משימה B). הטוויטים האירוניים נאספו באמצעות האשטגים הקשורים לאירוניה (כלומר #אירוניה, #סרקזם, #לא) ולאחר מכן נכתבו באופן ידני כדי להפחית כמות הרעש בגופה. לפני ההפצה של הנתונים, האשטגים שהשתמשו לאסוף את הטוויטים הוסרו מהקורפוס. עבור שני המשימות, קבוצת אימון של 3,834 טוויטים, כמו גם קבוצת מבחן שמכילה 784 טוויטים. משימותינו המשותפות קיבלו הודעות מ-43 קבוצות עבור מסווג בינרי משימה A ומ31 קבוצות עבור משימה רבת-כיתה B. נקודות הסווג הגבוהות ביותר שנקבלו עבור שתי הסווגים הם F1= 0'}
{'en': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'ar': 'THU_NGN في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: اكتشاف السخرية من التغريدات باستخدام LSTM المتصل بكثافة والتعلم متعدد المهام', 'pt': 'THU_NGN no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Detecção de ironia do Tweet com LSTM densamente conectado e aprendizado multitarefa', 'es': 'THU_NGN en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Detección de ironía de tuits con LSTM densamente conectado y aprendizaje multitarea', 'fr': "THU_NGN à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Détection de l'ironie des tweets avec LSTM étroitement connecté et apprentissage multitâche", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のTHU_NGNタスク3 ：密接に接続されたLSTMとマルチタスク学習によるツイートのアイロニー検出', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务3 THU_NGN:以密接LSTM多任务学推文讽刺性检', 'ru': 'THU_NGN на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Обнаружение иронии твитов с плотно подключенным LSTM и многозадачным обучением', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर THU_NGN: घनी रूप से जुड़े LSTM और मल्टी-टास्क लर्निंग के साथ विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए ट्वीट करें', 'ga': 'THU_NGN ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Tweet Brath an Iarainn le LSTM atá nasctha go dlúth agus Foghlaim Ilthasc', 'hu': 'THU_NGN a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Tweet Irónia felismerése sűrűn kapcsolódó LSTM-vel és többfeladatos tanulással', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανίχνευση ειρωνείας με πυκνά συνδεδεμένη και πολυtasking μάθηση', 'ka': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 დავალება 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-Task Learning', 'kk': 'THU_NGN at semiEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Deny connected LSTM and Multi-Task Learning', 'lt': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'it': "THU_NGN a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Rilevamento dell'ironia con LSTM densamente connesso e apprendimento multi-task", 'mk': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'ms': 'THU_NGN di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Pengesanan Ironi Tweet dengan LSTM yang terhubung dengan keras dan Pembelajaran Berberbilang-Tugas', 'mt': 'THU_NGN f’SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-Task Learning', 'mn': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3-ല്\u200d THU_NGN: ഡെന്\u200dസെല്ലി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട LSTM- ലും പല-ജോലി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുമുള്ള ട്വീറ്റ് ഐറോന', 'pl': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Tweet Wykrywanie ironii z gęsto połączonym LSTM i wielozadaniowym uczeniem się', 'no': 'THU_NGN at semiEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-Task Learning', 'sr': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'ro': 'THU_NGN la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Tweet Detectarea ironiei cu LSTM conectat intens și învățarea multi-sarcini', 'so': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Ironin Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'si': 'THU_NGN at semeval-2018 Job 3: Tweet Ironic Detection with Densely Paired LSTM and Multi-Job Training', 'sv': 'THU_NGN på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Tweet Irony Detection med tätt ansluten LSTM och Multi-Task Learning', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 3- ல் THU_ NGN: செயல்பாடு இணைக்கப்பட்ட LSTM மற்றும் பல பணி கற்று', 'ur': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đang tìm kiếm sự phát hiện nghịch phấn với mật độ kết nối mật mật với HTTM và đa nhiệm vụ học.', 'da': 'THU_NGN på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Tweet Irony Detection med tæt tilsluttet LSTM og Multi-task Learning', 'hr': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Tweet Irony Detection s Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'de': 'THU_NGN auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Tweet Ironie Detection mit dicht vernetztem LSTM und Multi-Task Learning', 'id': 'THU_NGN di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'ko': 'THU NGN이SemEval-18 퀘스트 3: 밀집된 연결된 LSTM과 다중 퀘스트 학습을 이용하여 트위터 반풍 탐지', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Откриване на ирония с плътно свързано обучение и многозадачи', 'nl': 'THU_NGN op SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Tweet Ironie Detectie met Dicht verbonden LSTM en Multi-Task Learning', 'sw': 'THU_NGN kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Utafiti wa Uwekezi wa Twita na Kuhusiana na LSTM na Kufunza kazi nyingi', 'fa': 'THU', 'af': 'THU_NGN by SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Tweet Irony Deteksie met Densely verbind LSTM en Multi-Task Leer', 'sq': 'THU_NGN në SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-Task Learning', 'am': 'ስራ 3', 'tr': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'az': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'hy': 'THU_NCN-炸 "Hale-2018-斋" 3-謤栅 瞻铡斩毡斩铡謤铡謤崭謧诈盏崭謧斩崭謧沾. Tweet-炸 "缘謤铡摘辗湛崭謧诈盏铡斩 瞻铡盏湛斩铡闸榨謤崭謧沾" 窄斋战湛 寨铡蘸站铡债 LSMT-斋 謬 闸铡咋沾铡瞻铡斩毡斩铡謤铡謤崭謧诈盏崭謧斩斩榨謤斋 战崭站崭謤榨宅崭謧 沾斋栈崭謥崭站', 'ca': 'THU_NGN a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely Connected LSTM and Multi-Task Learning', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ৩-এ থিউ_NGN: ডেন্সেলি সংযুক্ত LSTM এবং বহুকার কাজ শিক্ষার সাথে টুইট করা আইরোনিক সনিক্তান', 'bs': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Tweet Irony Detection s Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'cs': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Tweet Detekce ironie s hustě propojeným LSTM a Multi-Task Learning', 'fi': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Tiheästi connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning', 'et': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 ülesandel 3: Tweet iroonia tuvastamine tihedalt ühendatud LSTM ja mitme ülesandega õppimine', 'jv': 'thoU_NGN at semi-2008 task 3: Tuet irny detection with DenSely connected LTT M and Multi-task Learning', 'sk': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 naloga 3: Zaznavanje ironije Tweet z gosto povezanim LSTM in večopravilnim učenjem', 'he': 'THU_NGN ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: גילוי אירוניה טוויט', 'ha': 'FAILE', 'bo': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Tweet Irony Detection with Densely connected LSTM and Multi-task Learning'}
{'en': 'Detecting irony is an important task to mine fine-grained information from social web messages. Therefore, the Semeval-2018 task 3 is aimed to detect the ironic tweets (subtask A) and their ironic types (subtask B). In order to address this task, we propose a system based on a densely connected LSTM network with multi-task learning strategy. In our dense LSTM model, each layer will take all outputs from previous layers as input. The last LSTM layer will output the hidden representations of texts, and they will be used in three classification task. In addition, we incorporate several types of features to improve the model performance. Our model achieved an F-score of 70.54 (ranked 2/43) in the subtask A and 49.47 (ranked 3/29) in the subtask B. The experimental results validate the effectiveness of our system.', 'ar': 'يعد اكتشاف المفارقة مهمة مهمة لاستخراج المعلومات الدقيقة من رسائل الويب الاجتماعية. لذلك ، تهدف مهمة Semeval-2018 3 إلى الكشف عن التغريدات الساخرة (المهمة الفرعية A) وأنواعها الساخرة (المهمة الفرعية B). من أجل معالجة هذه المهمة ، نقترح نظامًا يعتمد على شبكة LSTM متصلة بكثافة مع إستراتيجية تعلم متعددة المهام. في نموذج LSTM الكثيف الخاص بنا ، ستأخذ كل طبقة جميع المخرجات من الطبقات السابقة كمدخلات. ستخرج طبقة LSTM الأخيرة التمثيلات المخفية للنصوص ، وسيتم استخدامها في ثلاث مهام تصنيف. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقوم بدمج عدة أنواع من الميزات لتحسين أداء النموذج. حقق نموذجنا درجة F 70.54 (المرتبة 2/43) في المهمة الفرعية A و 49.47 (المرتبة 3/29) في المهمة الفرعية B. النتائج التجريبية تثبت فعالية نظامنا.', 'es': 'Detectar la ironía es una tarea importante para extraer información detallada de los mensajes de las redes sociales. Por lo tanto, la tarea 3 del Semeval-2018 tiene como objetivo detectar los tuits irónicos (subtarea A) y sus tipos irónicos (subtarea B). Para abordar esta tarea, proponemos un sistema basado en una red LSTM densamente conectada con una estrategia de aprendizaje multitarea. En nuestro modelo LSTM denso, cada capa tomará todas las salidas de las capas anteriores como entrada. La última capa LSTM generará las representaciones ocultas de los textos y se utilizarán en tres tareas de clasificación. Además, incorporamos varios tipos de funciones para mejorar el rendimiento del modelo. Nuestro modelo obtuvo un puntaje F de 70.54 (puesto 2/43) en la subtarea A y 49.47 (puesto 3/29) en la subtarea B. Los resultados experimentales validan la eficacia de nuestro sistema.', 'fr': "La détection de l'ironie est une tâche importante pour extraire des informations précises à partir de messages Web sociaux. Par conséquent, la tâche 3 Semeval-2018 vise à détecter les tweets ironiques (sous-tâche A) et leurs types ironiques (sous-tâche B). Afin de répondre à cette tâche, nous proposons un système basé sur un réseau LSTM fortement connecté avec une stratégie d'apprentissage multitâche. Dans notre modèle LSTM dense, chaque couche prend en entrée toutes les sorties des couches précédentes. La dernière couche LSTM produira les représentations cachées des textes, qui seront utilisées dans trois tâches de classification. De plus, nous intégrons plusieurs types de fonctionnalités pour améliorer les performances du modèle. Notre modèle a obtenu un score F de 70,54 (classé 2/43) dans la sous-tâche A et de 49,47 (classé 3/29) dans la sous-tâche B. Les résultats expérimentaux valident l'efficacité de notre système.", 'pt': 'Detectar ironia é uma tarefa importante para extrair informações refinadas de mensagens da web social. Portanto, a tarefa 3 do Semeval-2018 tem como objetivo detectar os tweets irônicos (subtarefa A) e seus tipos irônicos (subtarefa B). Para resolver esta tarefa, propomos um sistema baseado em uma rede LSTM densamente conectada com estratégia de aprendizado multitarefa. Em nosso modelo LSTM denso, cada camada receberá todas as saídas das camadas anteriores como entrada. A última camada do LSTM produzirá as representações ocultas dos textos, e elas serão usadas em três tarefas de classificação. Além disso, incorporamos vários tipos de recursos para melhorar o desempenho do modelo. Nosso modelo alcançou um F-score de 70,54 (classificado 2/43) na subtarefa A e 49,47 (classificado 3/29) na subtarefa B. Os resultados experimentais validam a eficácia do nosso sistema.', 'ja': '皮肉を検出することは、ソーシャルウェブメッセージから細かい情報をマイニングするための重要なタスクです。したがって、Semeval -2018タスク3は、皮肉なツイート（サブタスクA ）とその皮肉なタイプ（サブタスクB ）を検出することを目的としている。この課題に対処するために、マルチタスク学習戦略を備えた密接に接続されたLSTMネットワークに基づくシステムを提案する。密度の高いLSTMモデルでは、各レイヤーは以前のレイヤーからのすべての出力を入力とします。最後のLSTMレイヤーはテキストの隠された表現を出力し、それらは3つの分類タスクで使用されます。さらに、モデルのパフォーマンスを向上させるために、いくつかのタイプの機能を組み込んでいます。私たちのモデルは、サブタスクAで70.54 （ランク2/43 ）、サブタスクBで49.47 （ランク3/29 ）のFスコアを達成しました。実験結果は、私たちのシステムの有効性を検証しています。', 'zh': '检刺一切要务,可于社交网络中掘细粒度信息。 是以Semeval-2018务3意在检刺意推文(子职A)及其刺类(子职B)。 为此者,举一LSTM网络之统,有多任务学习策略。 于我密集 LSTM 模中,每一层皆输旧数层为输。 最后一 LSTM 图层将输文本之隐,其用于三分。 整合数者,以崇其能也。 吾法取 70.54 于子职 A (名 2/43)之 F 得分,得 49.47 分于子务 B (排名第 3/29 分)。 实验验其有效性。', 'hi': 'विडंबना का पता लगाना सामाजिक वेब संदेशों से ठीक-ठीक जानकारी का खनन करने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। इसलिए, Semeval-2018 कार्य 3 का उद्देश्य विडंबनात्मक ट्वीट्स (सबटास्क ए) और उनके विडंबनापूर्ण प्रकारों (सबटास्क बी) का पता लगाना है। इस कार्य को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम बहु-कार्य सीखने की रणनीति के साथ एक घनी रूप से जुड़े एलएसटीएम नेटवर्क के आधार पर एक प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे घने LSTM मॉडल में, प्रत्येक परत इनपुट के रूप में पिछली परतों से सभी outputs ले जाएगा। अंतिम LSTM परत ग्रंथों के छिपे हुए प्रतिनिधित्व को आउटपुट करेगी, और उनका उपयोग तीन वर्गीकरण कार्य में किया जाएगा। इसके अलावा, हम मॉडल प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए कई प्रकार की सुविधाओं को शामिल करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल ने सबटास्क ए में 70.54 (रैंक 2/43) और सबटास्क बी में 49.47 (3/29 रैंक) का एफ-स्कोर हासिल किया। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम हमारे सिस्टम की प्रभावशीलता को मान्य करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Обнаружение иронии является важной задачей для извлечения мелкозернистой информации из социальных веб-сообщений. Поэтому задача 3 Semeval-2018 направлена на выявление иронических твитов (подзадача А) и их иронических типов (подзадача Б). Для решения этой задачи мы предлагаем систему, основанную на густо подключенной сети LSTM с многозадачной стратегией обучения. В нашей плотной модели LSTM каждый слой будет принимать все выходы из предыдущих слоев в качестве входных данных. Последний слой LSTM выведет скрытые представления текстов, и они будут использоваться в трех задачах классификации. Кроме того, мы включаем несколько типов функций для улучшения производительности модели. Наша модель достигла F-балла 70,54 (2/43) в подзадаче А и 49,47 (3/29) в подзадаче Б. Экспериментальные результаты подтверждают эффективность нашей системы.', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach é íoróin a bhrath chun faisnéis mhionsonraithe a fháil ó theachtaireachtaí gréasáin sóisialta. Mar sin, tá tasc 3 Semeval-2018 dírithe ar na tweets ironic (fothasc A) agus a gcineálacha ironic (fothasc B) a bhrath. Chun dul i ngleic leis an tasc seo, molaimid córas bunaithe ar líonra LSTM dlúth-nasctha le straitéis foghlama il-tasc. Inár múnla dlúth LSTM, glacfaidh gach ciseal na haschuir go léir ó na sraitheanna roimhe seo mar ionchur. Aschuirfear an ciseal LSTM deiridh na huiríll folaithe de théacsanna, agus úsáidfear iad i dtrí thasc aicmithe. Ina theannta sin, táimid ag ionchorprú roinnt cineálacha gnéithe chun feidhmíocht an mhúnla a fheabhsú. Bhain ár múnla scór-F de 70.54 (rangaithe 2/43) amach i bhfothasc A agus 49.47 (rangaithe 3/29) i bhfothasc B. Déanann na torthaí turgnamhacha éifeachtacht ár gcóras a bhailíochtú.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση ειρωνείας είναι ένα σημαντικό καθήκον για την εξόρυξη λεπτόκοκκων πληροφοριών από τα μηνύματα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Ως εκ τούτου, η εργασία 3 έχει ως στόχο την ανίχνευση των ειρωνικών tweets (υποτάξη Α) και των ειρωνικών τύπων τους (υποτάξη Β). Προκειμένου να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το έργο, προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα βασισμένο σε ένα πυκνά συνδεδεμένο δίκτυο με στρατηγική μάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών. Στο πυκνό μοντέλο κάθε στρώμα θα λάβει όλες τις εξόδους από προηγούμενα στρώματα ως είσοδο. Το τελευταίο στρώμα θα παράγει τις κρυφές αναπαραστάσεις των κειμένων και θα χρησιμοποιηθούν σε τρεις εργασίες ταξινόμησης. Επιπλέον, ενσωματώνουμε διάφορους τύπους χαρακτηριστικών για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης του μοντέλου. Το μοντέλο μας πέτυχε μια βαθμολογία Φ 70.54 (κατάταξη 2/43) στην υποταγή Α και 49.47 (κατάταξη 3/29) στην υποταγή Β. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα επικυρώνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του συστήματός μας.', 'hu': 'Az irónia felismerése fontos feladat a közösségi webes üzenetekből származó finomszemcsés információk kivonásának. Ezért a Semeval-2018 feladat 3 célja az ironikus tweetek (A) és azok ironikus típusai (B) felismerése. Ennek a feladatnak a megoldása érdekében egy sűrűn összekapcsolt LSTM hálózaton alapuló rendszert javasolunk többfeladatos tanulási stratégiával. A sűrű LSTM modellünkben minden réteg bemenetként veszi az előző rétegek összes kimenetét. Az utolsó LSTM réteg a szövegek rejtett ábrázolását adja ki, és ezeket három osztályozási feladatban használják. Ezenkívül többféle funkciót is tartalmazunk a modell teljesítményének javítása érdekében. Modellünk 70,54 (2/43) F pontszámot ért el az A részfeladatban és 49,47 (3/29) a B részfeladatban. A kísérleti eredmények igazolják rendszerünk hatékonyságát.', 'ka': 'იპონიის განახლება მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო სოციალური საბოლო შეტყობინებებიდან ჩემი სუციალური ინფორმაციის შესახებ. ამიტომ, მე-გველი-2018 სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მინდა იპონიკური ტიგები (A) და იპონიკური ტიპები (B) განახვა. ამ დავალების შესახებისთვის, ჩვენ მინდომა სისტემა, რომელიც ბევრი დაკავშირებულია LSTM ქსელის მრავალ დასწავლა სტრატიგია. ჩვენი სიგრძელი LSTM მოდელში, ყოველ ნახატი ყველა ნახატიდან ყველა ნახატიდან გადატანა. ბოლოდან LSTM ჩატვირთვა ტექსტის დაკლექტირებულების გამოყენება და ისინი სამი კლასიფიკაციის დავალებაში გამოყენება. დამატებით, ჩვენ ვიყავით რამდენიმე ტიპი ფუნქციები, რომლებიც მოდელური მუშაობას უფრო მეტივად. ჩვენი მოდელია 70,54-ის F-score (პრენტი 2/43) და 49,47-ში (პრენტი 3/29) დაიწყება B-ში. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა ჩვენი სისტემის ეფექტიურობას.', 'it': "Individuare l'ironia è un compito importante per estrarre informazioni a grana fine dai messaggi social web. Pertanto, il compito 3 di Semeval-2018 è volto a rilevare i tweet ironici (sottomissione A) e i loro tipi ironici (sottomissione B). Per affrontare questo compito, proponiamo un sistema basato su una rete LSTM densamente connessa con strategia di apprendimento multi-task. Nel nostro modello LSTM denso, ogni livello prenderà tutte le uscite dai livelli precedenti come input. L'ultimo livello LSTM produrrà le rappresentazioni nascoste dei testi, e saranno utilizzati in tre attività di classificazione. Inoltre, incorporamo diversi tipi di funzionalità per migliorare le prestazioni del modello. Il nostro modello ha ottenuto un punteggio F di 70,54 (classificato 2/43) nella sottomissione A e 49,47 (classificato 3/29) nella sottomissione B. I risultati sperimentali convalidano l'efficacia del nostro sistema.", 'kk': 'Иронияны анықтау - әлеуметтік веб- хаттардан таңдаған мәліметім үшін маңызды тапсырма. Сондықтан, жарты-жарты-2018 тапсырмасы 3-нің ирониялық tweets (A- суретті) мен олардың ирониялық түрлерін (B- суретті) анықтау мақсаты болады. Бұл тапсырманы шешу үшін біз көп тапсырманың оқыту стратегиясы бар LSTM желіне негізделген жүйені ұсынамыз. Өзіміздің жиікті LSTM үлгісінде, әрбір қабат алдыңғы қабаттардың барлық шығысын келтіру үшін алып тастайды. Соңғы LSTM қабатының жасырын мәтіндердің көрсетілімдерін шығаратын және олар үш шектеу тапсырмасында қолданылады. Қосымша, үлгі жылдамдығын жақсарту үшін бірнеше түрлі мүмкіндіктерді құрамыз. Біздің үлгіміз B суретінде 70,54 (2/43 ретінде) F-нұсқасын (3/29 ретінде) жеткізді. Тәжірибелі нәтижелері жүйеміздің эффектілігін тексереді.', 'lt': 'Ironijos nustatymas yra svarbus uždavinys surinkti smulkią informaciją iš socialinių žiniasklaidų. Todėl 3 pusmečio užduotis – nustatyti ironinius tweetus (A paklausa) ir jų ironinius tipus (B paklausa). Siekdami išspręsti šią užduotį, siūlome sistemą, grindžiamą tankiai sujungtu LSTM tinklu ir daugiafunkciniu mokymosi strategija. In our dense LSTM model, each layer will take all outputs from previous layers as input.  Paskutinis LSTM sluoksnis ištrauks paslėptus tekstų atvaizdus ir jie bus naudojami trims klasifikavimo užduotims. Be to, mes įtraukiame kelių tipų savybes modelio veiksmingumui gerinti. Mūsų modelis pasiekė F rezultatą 70,54 (2/43 laipsnio) A ir 49,47 (3/29 laipsnio) B paklausime. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai patvirtina mūsų sistemos veiksmingumą.', 'ms': 'Mengesan ironi adalah tugas penting untuk tembak maklumat yang sempurna dari mesej web sosial. Oleh itu, tugas Semeval-2018 3 bertujuan untuk mengesan tweet ironik (subtask A) dan jenis ironik mereka (subtask B). Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami cadangkan sistem berdasarkan rangkaian LSTM yang tersambung dengan strategi pembelajaran berbilang tugas. Dalam model LSTM padat kita, setiap lapisan akan mengambil semua output dari lapisan terdahulu sebagai input. The last LSTM layer will output the hidden representations of texts, and they will be used in three classification task.  Selain itu, kami memasukkan beberapa jenis ciri-ciri untuk meningkatkan prestasi model. Model kami mencapai skor-F 70.54 (berturut-turut 2/43) di bawah tanya A dan 49.47 (berturut-turut 3/29) di bawah tanya B. Hasil percubaan mengesahkan kegunaan sistem kita.', 'ml': 'പരിഹാസത്തെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് എന്\u200dറെ സാമൂഹ്യ വെബില്\u200d നിന്നും നല്ല വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എന്\u200dറെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജ അതുകൊണ്ട്, സെമെവാല്\u200d-2018 പണിയില്\u200d 3 വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികളുടെ (സബ്ജാബ് A) ടൂട്ടുകളും അവരുടെ പരിഹസിക്കുന്ന തരത്തിലുള്ള തരത്തില ഈ ജോലി വിവരമറിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പല ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്ന പദ്ധതി നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d LSTM മോഡലില്\u200d, എല്ലാ സ്വതവും മുമ്പുള്ള layers-ല്\u200d നിന്നും എല്ലാ പുറത്തുകളും ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടില്\u200d നി അവസാനത്തെ LSTM layer പദാവലികളുടെ ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കും. അവയെ മൂന്നു വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ ജോല കൂടാതെ, മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിക്കൊടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പല തരം വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dത്തുകൊ ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d 70.54 (2/43) ഉള്ള ഒരു F-സ്കോര്\u200d നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തനത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും 49.47 (3', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на иронијата е важна задача да се пронајдат фини информации од социјалните веб пораки. Затоа, задачата 3 на полувекот-2018 има за цел да ги детектира ироничките твитови (подпрашање А) и нивните иронички типови (подпрашање Б). За да ја решиме оваа задача, предложуваме систем базиран на густо поврзана мрежа на ЛСТМ со стратегија за учење на мултизадачи. Во нашиот густ LSTM модел, секој слој ќе ги земе сите излези од претходните слоеви како влог. Последниот слој на LSTM ќе ги извади скриените претставувања на текстите, и тие ќе бидат употребени во три класификациски задачи. Покрај тоа, вклучуваме неколку видови карактеристики за подобрување на резултатите на моделот. Нашиот модел постигна F-оценка од 70,54 (рангирано 2/43) во подпрашањето А и 49,47 (рангирано 3/29) во подпрашањето Б. Експерименталните резултати ја валидираат ефикасноста на нашиот систем.', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta tal-ironija hija kompitu importanti biex tinġabar minjiera l-informazzjoni fina minn messaġġi soċjali fuq l-internet. Għalhekk, il-kompitu 3 Semevali-2018 huwa mmirat li jidentifika t-tweets ironiċi (subtask A) u t-tipi ironiċi tagħhom (subtask B). Sabiex nindirizzaw dan il-kompitu, nipproponu sistema bbażata fuq netwerk ta’ LSTM densament konness bi strateġija ta’ tagħlim b’diversi kompiti. Fil-mudell ta’ LSTM dens tagħna, kull saff se jieħu r-riżultati kollha minn saffi preċedenti bħala input. L-aħħar saff ta’ LSTM se joħroġ ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet moħbija tat-testi, u se jintużaw fi tliet kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni. Barra minn hekk, inkorporaw diversi tipi ta’ karatteristiċi biex itejbu l-prestazzjoni tal-mudell. Il-mudell tagħna kiseb punteġġ F ta’ 70.54 (ikklassifikat 2/43) fis-sottomistoqsija A u 49.47 (ikklassifikat 3/29) fis-sottomistoqsija B. Ir-riżultati sperimentali jivvalidaw l-effettività tas-sistema tagħna.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie ironii jest ważnym zadaniem wydobywania drobnych informacji z wiadomości społecznościowych. Dlatego zadanie Semeval-2018 3 ma na celu wykrycie ironicznych tweetów (podzadanie A) i ich typów ironicznych (podzadanie B). Aby sprostać temu zadaniu, proponujemy system oparty na gęsto połączonej sieci LSTM z wielozadaniową strategią uczenia się. W naszym gęstym modelu LSTM każda warstwa przyjmie wszystkie wyjścia z poprzednich warstw jako wejście. Ostatnia warstwa LSTM wyświetli ukryte reprezentacje tekstów i zostaną one wykorzystane w trzech zadaniach klasyfikacji. Ponadto włączamy kilka rodzajów funkcji, aby poprawić wydajność modelu. Nasz model osiągnął wynik F 70,54 (ranking 2/43) w podzadaniu A i 49.47 (ranking 3/29) w podzadaniu B. Wyniki eksperymentalne potwierdzają skuteczność naszego systemu.', 'mn': 'Ийм зураг олж мэдэх нь нийгмийн вэб захирагдсан мэдээлэл миний чухал ажил юм. Тиймээс, 2018 оны дундаж зууны 3 даалгавар нь гайхалтай tweets (А-г суурь асуулт) болон тэдний гайхалтай төрлүүдийг (B-г суурь асуулт) олж мэдэх зорилго юм. Энэ ажлыг зохиохын тулд бид олон ажлын суралцах стратеги дээр жижиг холбоотой LSTM сүлжээнд суурилсан системийг санал болгоно. Бидний жингийн LSTM загвар дээр давхар бүр өмнөх давхар давхараас бүх гаралуудыг input болгох болно. Сүүлийн LSTM давхар нь текстүүдийн нууцлаг илэрхийллийг гаргаж өгнө. Тэд 3 давхар давхар давхар дээр хэрэглэгддэг. Мөн бид загварын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд олон төрлийн өөрчлөлт бүрдүүлдэг. Бидний загварын загвар нь А болон 49.47 (3/29) дотор F-тоо 70.54 (2/43) байдаг бөгөөд бидний системийн үр дүнг шалгаж байна.', 'ro': 'Detectarea ironiei este o sarcină importantă pentru extragerea informațiilor fine din mesajele web de socializare. Prin urmare, sarcina Semeval-2018 3 are ca scop detectarea tweeturilor ironice (subactivitatea A) și a tipurilor ironice ale acestora (subactivitatea B). Pentru a rezolva această sarcină, propunem un sistem bazat pe o rețea LSTM dens conectată, cu strategie de învățare multi-task. În modelul LSTM dens, fiecare strat va lua toate ieșirile din straturile anterioare ca intrare. Ultimul strat LSTM va ieși reprezentările ascunse ale textelor și vor fi utilizate în trei sarcini de clasificare. În plus, încorporăm mai multe tipuri de caracteristici pentru a îmbunătăți performanța modelului. Modelul nostru a obținut un scor F de 70,54 (clasat 2/43) în subactivitatea A și 49,47 (clasat 3/29) în subactivitatea B. Rezultatele experimentale validează eficiența sistemului nostru.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av irony er ein viktig oppgåve for å finna informasjon frå sosiale nettmeldingar. Dette er derfor den halvvekslane-2018-oppgåva 3 for å finna ironiske tweetene (subtspør A) og sine ironiske typar (subtspør B). For å handtera denne oppgåva, foreslår vi eit system basert på ein tett tilkopla LSTM- nettverk med fleire oppgåver- læringsstrategi. I dense LSTM-modellen vil kvar lag ta alle utdata frå førre lag som inndata. Den siste LSTM-laget vil utføra dei gøymde representasjonane av tekstar, og dei vert bruka i tre klassifikasjonsprogrammet. I tillegg inkluderer vi fleire typar funksjonar for å forbetra modellen. Modellen vårt oppnådd eit F-score av 70,54 (rankert 2/43) i subtspørjinga A og 49,47 (rankert 3/29) i subtspørjinga B. Eksperimentalresultatet er validert effektiviteten av systemet vårt.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada jimicsigu waa shaqo muhiim ah oo aan macluumaadka aad u qabtay bogga internetka. Sidaa darteed shaqada 3 ee Semeval-2018 waxaa loogu talogaley in la ogaado Tweetka ironicka (sub-task A) iyo noocyadooda xilliga ah (sub-task B). In order to address this task, we propose a system based on a densely connected LSTM network with multi-task learning strategy.  Tusaalka LSTM ee noogu hooseeya, qaylad kastaaba wuxuu ka qaadan doonaa dhamaan waxyaabaha laga soo baxay qasnadaha hore sida input. Layerka ugu dambeeya LSTM ayaa soo bixi kara macluumaadyada qarsoon, waxaana lagu isticmaali doonaa saddex fasax. Intaas waxaa dheer oo aan ku qornaa noocyo kala duduwan, si aan u kordhino tababarka muusikada. Tusaalkayagii wuxuu gaadhay koox F ah 70.54 (saqafka 2/43) oo ku qoran sub-safka A iyo 49.47 (saqafka 3/29) oo ku qoran sub-safka B. Abaalka imtixaanka waxay xaqiijiyaan effektada nidaamka.', 'sv': 'Att upptäcka ironi är en viktig uppgift för att utvinna finkornig information från sociala webbmeddelanden. Därför syftar Semeval-2018 uppgift 3 till att upptäcka ironiska tweets (subaktivitet A) och deras ironiska typer (subaktivitet B). För att klara denna uppgift föreslår vi ett system baserat på ett tätt anslutet LSTM-nätverk med flerfunktionsinlärningsstrategi. I vår täta LSTM-modell tar varje lager alla utgångar från tidigare lager som indata. Det sista LSTM-lagret kommer att generera dolda representationer av texter, och de kommer att användas i tre klassificeringsuppgifter. Dessutom införlivar vi flera typer av funktioner för att förbättra modellens prestanda. Vår modell uppnådde en F-poäng på 70,54 (rankad 2/43) i underuppgiften A och 49,47 (rankad 3/29) i underuppgiften B. De experimentella resultaten bekräftar effektiviteten av vårt system.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje ironija je važan zadatak za moju novu informaciju iz socijalnih web poruka. Stoga je zadatak 3. polovekovekova-2018 cilj da otkrije ironičke tweete (podpitanje A) i njihove ironičke vrste (podpitanje B). Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem koji se temelji na gustoj povezanoj LSTM mreži sa strategijom za učenje više zadataka. U našem gustom LSTM modelu, svaki sloj će uzeti sve izlaze iz prethodnih slojeva kao ulaz. Poslednji LSTM sloj će izvesti skrivene predstave teksta, i koristiti će se u tri klasifikacijskog zadatka. Osim toga, uključivali smo nekoliko vrsta karakteristika da bi poboljšali model izvršnost. Naš model je postigao F-rezultat od 70,54 (rank 2/43) u podpitanju A i 49,47 (rank 3/29) u podpitanju B. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg sistema.', 'si': 'සාමාජික වෙබ් පණිවිඩයෙන් මගේ ප්\u200dරමාණ තොරතුරු ගැන වැදගත් වැදගත් වැඩක්. ඉතින්, මධ්\u200dයාවික-2018 වැඩ 3 වැඩේ ඉලක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ අයිරෝනික ට්විට් සොයාගන්න (A සබ් අහන්න) සහ ඔවුන්ගේ අ මේ වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න, අපි පද්ධතියක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ LSTM ජාලය ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සම අපේ ගොඩක් LSTM මෝඩේල් වල, හැම ස්තරම් පිළිබඳ සියළු ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර අන්තිම LSTM ස්ථානය පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරයි, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන් ව ඒ වගේම, අපි මොඩල් ප්\u200dරමාණය වැඩි කරන්න විශේෂ වර්ගයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. අපේ මොඩල් එක 70.54 (රැක්ස් 2/43) ගැන F-score සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුණා, A සහ 49.47 (රැක්ස් 3/29) සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් B වල. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අපේ පද්', 'ta': 'விளையாட்டை கண்டுபிடிப்பது என்னுடைய நன்றாக பிடிக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் சமூக வலை செய்திகளில் இருந்து. ஆகையால், செம்வால்- 2018 செயல் 3 என்பது ironic tweets (subtask A) மற்றும் அலட்சியமான வகைகள் (subtask B) கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும். இந்த செயலை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பை முறைமையில் மேலும் இணைக்கப்பட்ட LSTM வலைப்பின்னலில் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்.  எங்கள் கனமான LSTM மாதிரியில், ஒவ்வொரு அடுக்கும் முந்தைய அடுக்குகளிலிருந்து அனைத்து வெளியீடுகளையும் உள கடைசி LSTM அடுக்கு உரைகளின் மறைந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் பொருள்களை வெளியிடும், அவை மூன்று வகைப்பு பணியில் பயன்படுத மாதிரி செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த பல வகையான குணங்களை நாம் சேர்க்கிறோம். Our model achieved an F-score of 70.54 (ranked 2/43) in the subtask A and 49.47 (ranked 3/29) in the subtask B. The experimental results validate the effectiveness of our system.', 'ur': 'ہیرونی کا تلاش کرنا مجھے سوسیل ویب پیغام سے بہترین دانے معلومات کے لئے ایک اہم کام ہے۔ لہٰذا نصف وصول-2018 کی تابع ۳ کی مطلب ہے کہ ایرونیک ٹیوٹ (A) اور ان کی ایرونیک ٹیوٹ (B) کو پہچان سکیں۔ ہم نے اس کام کے بارے میں ایک سیسٹم کی پیشنهاد کریں جو ملتی-ٹاکس کی تعلیم استراتژی کے ساتھ ملتی ٹاکس ٹیٹم نیٹ ورک پر بنیاد ہے۔ ہمارے گہرے LSTM موڈل میں، ہر لائر پہلے لہروں سے تمام آئٹپوٹ کو اینپیٹ کے طور پر لے جائے گا. آخرین LSTM لائر ٹیکسٹ کے مخفی نمونات کو اخراج کرے گا، اور وہ تین کلاسپیٹ کام میں استعمال کیے جائیں گے. اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے چند طریقے فکرتوں میں شامل کئے ہیں کہ موڈل فکرتوں کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے۔ ہمارے مدل نے 70.54 (رانڈ 2/43) کی ایک F-score (رانڈ 2/43) کو سٹسٹسٹم میں A اور 49.47 (رانڈ 3/29) حاصل کیا۔ آزمائش نتیجے ہمارے سیستم کی تابعداری کو ثابت قدم رکھتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Шундай қилиб, Semeval-2018 vazifa 3, ironisk tweetini (subvazifa A) va uning ironis turlarini (sub vazifa B) aniqlashga ega bo'ladi. Bu vazifani boshqarish uchun biz bir necha vazifa o'rganish strategiya bilan bogʻliq LSTM tarmoqdagi tizimni yaratib beramiz. Koʻproq LSTM modelida, har qatlam oldingi qatlamdan hamma natijalarni input sifatida olib tashlaydi. Oxirgi LSTM qatlam matnlarning bekitilgan koʻrinishini chiqaradi, va ular uchta darajada ishlatiladi. Ko'pchilik, biz model bajarishni bajarish uchun bir necha xil xususiyatlarni birlashtiramiz. Bizning modelimizning tub vazifasi A va 49.47 (3/29 rangi) bilan F-scori 70.54 (rangi 2/43) tugatdi. Taʼminlovchi natijalari tizimmizning effektini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện sự trớ trêu là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng để khai thác thông tin chi tiết từ mạng xã hội. Do đó, nhiệm vụ Semeval-thậm chí là nhiệm vụ 3 nhằm phát hiện những tweet mỉa mai (subtle A) và những kiểu mỉa mai của chúng (subtle B). Để thực hiện nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống dựa trên một mạng giao dịch đông đúc với chiến lược học tập nhiều nhiệm vụ. Trong mô hình LSD dày đặc, mỗi lớp sẽ lấy mọi kết xuất từ lớp trước làm nhập. Cái lớp LSD cuối cùng sẽ xuất ra các biểu tượng ẩn của văn bản, và chúng sẽ được dùng trong ba nhiệm vụ phân loại. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi có nhiều loại tính năng để nâng cao khả năng của mô hình. Mẫu của chúng tôi đã đạt được điểm F của 7054 (thứ 2/43) trong phần A và 42.47 (thứ 3/29) trong phần phụ B. Kết quả thử nghiệm xác nhận hiệu quả hệ thống của chúng tôi.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje ironija je važan zadatak za moju novčanu informaciju iz socijalnih web poruka. Stoga je zadatak 3. poljevekova-2018 cilj otkrivanja ironičkih tweeta (podpitanja A) i njihovih ironičkih tipa (podpitanja B). Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem baziran na gustoj povezanoj mreži LSTM sa strategijom učenja višezadataka. U našem gustom LSTM modelu, svaki sloj će uzeti sve izlaze iz prethodnih slojeva kao ulaz. Posljednji LSTM sloj će izložiti skrivene zastupe teksta i koristiti se u tri klasifikacijskog zadatka. Osim toga, uključujemo nekoliko vrsta karakteristika kako bi poboljšali modelnu funkciju. Naš model je postigao F-rezultat od 70,54 (redovito 2/43) u podpitanju A i 49,47 (redovito 3/29) u podpitanju B. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg sustava.', 'bg': 'Откриването на иронията е важна задача за извличане на фина информация от социалните уеб съобщения. Ето защо задача 3 "Семевал-2018" има за цел да открие ироничните туитове (подзадача А) и техните иронични типове (подзадача Б). За да се справим с тази задача, предлагаме система, базирана на гъсто свързана мрежа с мултизадачна стратегия за учене. В нашия плътен модел всеки слой ще вземе всички изходи от предишните слоеве като вход. Последният слой ще извлече скритите изображения на текстовете и те ще бъдат използвани в три задачи за класификация. В допълнение, ние включваме няколко вида функции за подобряване на производителността на модела. Нашият модел постигна F-резултат от 70,54 (класиране 2/43) в подзадача А и 49,47 (класиране 3/29) в подзадача Б. Експерименталните резултати потвърждават ефективността на нашата система.', 'da': 'At opdage ironi er en vigtig opgave at udvinde finkornede oplysninger fra sociale web-meddelelser. Derfor har Semeval-2018 opgave 3 til formål at opdage de ironiske tweets (underopgave A) og deres ironiske typer (underopgave B). For at løse denne opgave foreslår vi et system baseret på et tæt forbundet LSTM-netværk med multi-task learning strategi. I vores tætte LSTM model vil hvert lag tage alle output fra tidligere lag som input. Det sidste LSTM lag vil udsende de skjulte repræsentationer af tekster, og de vil blive brugt i tre klassifikationsopgaver. Derudover indarbejder vi flere typer funktioner for at forbedre modellens ydeevne. Vores model opnåede en F-score på 70,54 (rangeret 2/43) i underopgaven A og 49,47 (rangeret 3/29) i underopgaven B. Eksperimentelle resultater validerer effektiviteten af vores system.', 'nl': 'Ironie detecteren is een belangrijke taak om fijne informatie uit sociale webberichten te halen. Daarom is de Semeval-2018 taak 3 gericht op het detecteren van de ironische tweets (subtaak A) en hun ironische types (subtaak B). Om deze taak aan te pakken, stellen we een systeem voor gebaseerd op een dicht verbonden LSTM netwerk met multi-task leerstrategie. In ons dichte LSTM model neemt elke laag alle outputs van eerdere lagen als input. De laatste LSTM laag geeft de verborgen representaties van teksten uit, en ze zullen worden gebruikt in drie classificatietaken. Daarnaast integreren we verschillende soorten functies om de prestaties van het model te verbeteren. Ons model behaalde een F-score van 70.54 (gerangschikt 2/43) in de subtaak A en 49.47 (gerangschikt 3/29) in de subtaak B. De experimentele resultaten valideren de effectiviteit van ons systeem.', 'de': 'Ironie zu erkennen ist eine wichtige Aufgabe, um feinkörnige Informationen aus Social-Web-Nachrichten zu gewinnen. Daher zielt die Semeval-2018 Aufgabe 3 darauf ab, die ironischen Tweets (Subtask A) und ihre ironischen Typen (Subtask B) zu erkennen. Um dieser Aufgabe gerecht zu werden, schlagen wir ein System vor, das auf einem dicht vernetzten LSTM-Netzwerk mit Multi-Task-Lernstrategie basiert. In unserem dichten LSTM-Modell nimmt jede Ebene alle Ausgänge früherer Schichten als Eingabe. Die letzte LSTM-Ebene gibt die versteckten Darstellungen von Texten aus und sie werden in drei Klassifizierungsaufgaben verwendet. Darüber hinaus integrieren wir verschiedene Arten von Funktionen, um die Modellleistung zu verbessern. Unser Modell erzielte einen F-Score von 70.54 (Rang 2/43) in der Teilaufgabe A und 49.47 (Rang 3/29) in der Teilaufgabe B. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse bestätigen die Wirksamkeit unseres Systems.', 'id': 'Detektif ironi adalah tugas penting untuk menambahkan informasi baik dari pesan sosial web. Oleh karena itu, tugas Semeval-2018 3 ditujukan untuk mendeteksi tweet ironis (subtask A) dan tipe ironis mereka (subtask B). Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami mengusulkan sistem berdasarkan jaringan LSTM yang terhubung dengan strategi pembelajaran multitugas. Dalam model LSTM padat kita, setiap lapisan akan mengambil semua output dari lapisan sebelumnya sebagai input. Lapisan LSTM terakhir akan mengeluarkan representation tersembunyi dari teks, dan mereka akan digunakan dalam tiga tugas klasifikasi. Selain itu, kami memasukkan beberapa jenis fitur untuk meningkatkan prestasi model. Model kita mencapai skor F 70,54 (peringkat 2/43) di subtask A dan 49,47 (peringkat 3/29) di subtask B. Hasil eksperimen mengkvalifikasi efektif sistem kita.', 'fa': 'شناسایی ایرونی یک کار مهم برای اطلاعات خوب از پیام های وب اجتماعی من است. بنابراین، وظیفه سوم قرن-۲۰۰۸ هدف می\u200cگیرد که توئیت\u200cهای مسخره (زیر سوال A) و نوع مسخره\u200cی ایرونیک\u200cشان (زیر سوال B) را شناسایی کند. برای حل این کار، ما یک سیستم را پیشنهاد می کنیم که بر روی شبکه LSTM با استراتژی یادگیری زیادی از کار بسیار متصل شده است. در مدل LSTM dense ما، هر طبقه\u200cای از طبقه\u200cهای قبلی به عنوان وارد می\u200cشود. آخرین لایه LSTM نمایش\u200cهای مخفی از متن\u200cها را خروج می\u200cکند، و آنها در سه کار مخفی استفاده می\u200cشوند. در addition, we incorporate several types of features to improve the model performance. مدل ما به عنوان یک امتیاز F درجه ۷۰.۵۴ (درجه ۲/۳۴) در زیر سوال A و ۴۴.۴۴ (درجه ۳/۲۹) در زیر سوال B رسید. نتیجه آزمایش موثرت سیستم ما را ثابت می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Kugundua kejeli ni jukumu muhimu kwa taarifa zangu zinazotumika vizuri kutoka kwenye ujumbe wa kijamii. Kwa hiyo, jukumu la Semeval-2018 linalenga kugundua twiti za kejeli (subira A) na aina zao za kejeli (jukumu la subira B). Ili kuongea kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo unaoanzishwa na mtandao wa LSTM wenye mkakati wa kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi. Katika muundo wetu wa tete wa LSTM, kila daraja itachukua matokeo yote kutoka kwenye vipande vilivyopita kama input. Kiwango cha mwisho cha LSTM kitatoa maonyesho yaliyofichikana ya maandishi, na watatumiwa katika kazi tatu za daraja. Zaidi ya hayo, tunajumuisha aina kadhaa ya aina ya utendaji wa mifano. Mfano wetu ulipata nafasi ya F.54 (yenye rangi 2/43) katika kazi A na 49.47 (yenye rangi 3/29) katika kazi ya subira B. Matokeo ya majaribio yanathibitisha ufanisi wa mfumo wetu.', 'ko': '역설 검측은 소셜네트워크서비스 메시지에서 세립도 정보를 발굴하는 중요한 임무이다.따라서 Semeval-18 퀘스트 3은 풍자 트윗(하위 퀘스트 A)과 그 풍자 유형(하위 퀘스트 B)을 검출하기 위한 것이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 LSTM 네트워크를 밀접하게 연결하는 다중 임무 학습 시스템을 제시했다.밀집된 LSTM 모델에서는 각 레이어마다 이전 레이어의 모든 출력을 입력으로 사용합니다.마지막 LSTM에서는 세 가지 분류 작업에 사용할 텍스트의 숨겨진 표현을 내보냅니다.그 밖에 우리는 몇 가지 유형의 기능을 결합시켜 모델의 성능을 향상시켰다.우리의 모델은 하위 임무 A에서의 F 점수는 70.54(2/43), 하위 임무 B에서의 F 점수는 49.47(3/29)이다. 실험 결과는 우리 시스템의 유효성을 검증했다.', 'tr': 'Gyzylyk tapmak sosial web mesajlarymdan gaty görkezilen maglumatymyň üçin wajypdyr. Şol sebäpli, ýarysy-2018 zady 3-nji sany ironik tweetleri (subtask A) we olaryň ironiki türlerini (subtask B) açmak amaçlydyr. Bu zady çözmek üçin, biz multi-täblik öwrenmek strategiýasy bilen ýigrenýän LSTM şebekesine daýanýan bir sistemi teklip edip görýäris. Ýagtyk LSTM nusgasymyzda, her gatlak öňki katlardan gaýd etmek üçin ullar Soňki LSTM katmanı metin gizli temsillerini çykarar ve üç klasifikasyon göresinde kullanılacaklar. Munuň üstine nusgasyny geliştirmek üçin birnäçe tür üýtgewler bilen birleşdirdik. Biziň nusgymyz 70,54 (derejesi 2/43) Subquestion A we 49,47 (derejesi 3/29) Subquestion B subtask içinde tapyldy. Deneysel netijesi sistemamyzyň etkinleşigini barlaýar.', 'af': "Opdekking van ironie is 'n belangrike taak vir myne fyn-koring inligting van sosiale web boodskappe. Daarom is die Semevaal-2018 taak 3 bedoel om die ironiese tweete (subtask A) en hulle ironiese tipes (subtask B) te ontdek. In order to address this task, we propose a system based on a densely connected LSTM network with multi-task learning strategy. In ons dense LSTM model sal elke laag alle uitvoerdes van vorige laag as invoer neem. Die laaste LSTM laag sal uitvoer die versteke voorstellings van teks, en hulle sal gebruik word in drie klassifikasie taak. In addition, we incorporate several types of features to improve the model performance. Ons model het 'n F-telling van 70.54 (rangeer 2/43) gemaak in die subtfraag A en 49.47 (rangeer 3/29) in die subtfraag B. Die eksperimentale resultate het die effektiviteit van ons stelsel gelyk.", 'sq': 'Detektimi i ironisë është një detyrë e rëndësishme për të miniuar informacion të hollë nga mesazhet social web. Prandaj, detyra 3 gjysmë-2018 ka për qëllim të zbulojë tweetet ironike (nënpyetje A) dhe llojet e tyre ironike (nënpyetje B). In order to address this task, we propose a system based on a densely connected LSTM network with multi-task learning strategy.  Në modelin tonë të dendur LSTM, çdo shtresë do të marrë të gjitha daljet nga shtresat e mëparshme si input. Lajmi i fundit LSTM do të nxjerrë përfaqësimet e fshehta të teksteve dhe ato do të përdoren në tre detyra klasifikuese. Përveç kësaj, ne përfshijmë disa lloje karakteristike për të përmirësuar performancën e modelit. Modeli ynë arriti një rezultat F prej 70.54 (renditur 2/43) në nënpyetjen A dhe 49.47 (renditur 3/29) në nënpyetjen B. Rezultatet eksperimentale vlerësojnë efektshmërinë e sistemit tonë.', 'hy': 'Իրոնիայի հայտնաբերումը կարևոր խնդիր է սոցիալական վեբ հաղորդագրություններից ստացված գեղեցիկ տեղեկատվությունը հանելու համար: Այսպիսով, 2018-ի կիսադարի 3 խնդիրը նպատակն է հայտնաբերել հեգնական թվիթերը (A ենթահարց) և դրանց հեգնական տեսակները (B ենթահարց): Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք համակարգ, որը հիմնված է խիստ կապված LSMT ցանցի վրա և որը ունի բազմախնդիրներ սովորելու ռազմավարություն: Մեր խիստ LSMT մոդելի մեջ յուրաքանչյուր շերտ կվերցնի նախորդ շերտերի բոլոր արտադրանքները որպես ներմուծք: Վերջին LSMT շերտը կարտադրի տեքստների թաքնված ներկայացումները և դրանք կօգտագործվի երեք դասակարգման գործում: Ավելին, մենք ներառում ենք մի քանի տեսակի առանձնահատկություններ, որպեսզի բարելավենք մոդելը: Մեր մոդելը հասավ 70.54 ֆ-գնահատականի (2-43 գնահատականի) A-ի և 49.47 ֆ-գնահատականի (3-29 գնահատականի) B-ի ենթահարցում: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ստուգեցին մեր համակարգի արդյունավետությունը:', 'am': 'መረጃ ማግኘት ማኅበራዊ ድረክ መልዕክቶች የተጠቃሚ ስራ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም የሴሜቪል-2018 ስራ 3 የኢንተርኔት ትዊተቶችን (አዲስ ስራ A) እና የኢንተርናዊ ዓይነታቸውን (subtask B) ለማግኘት ነው፡፡ ይህንን ስራ ለመግለጽ፣ በብዙ-ስራ ትምህርት ተማሪ strategie የተጠቃሚ LSTM መረብ ላይ የተገኘውን ሲስተም እናስባለን፡፡ layers-action የመጨረሻው LSTM ደረጃ የተሰወረ የጽሑፎችን መልዕክት ያወጣል፥ በሦስት ክፍል ውስጥ ይጠቀማል። በተጨማሪም የምናሳድገውን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን አ እና አ አ 49.47 (ደረጃ 3/29) በተስራ B ውስጥ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'bn': 'আমার সামাজিক ওয়েব বার্তা থেকে সুনির্দিষ্ট তথ্য প্রদান করা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। তাই সেমেভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ৩ লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে বিদ্রূপ টুইট এবং তাদের বিদ্রূপ ধরনের (সাবটাবাস বি) সনাক্ত করতে। এই কাজের কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি সিস্টেমের প্রস্তাব করি যা অনেক কাজের শিক্ষা কৌশলের মাধ্যমে গভীর সংযুক্ত এলসিএম নেটওয়ার আমাদের গভীর এলসিএম মডেলে প্রত্যেক স্তরে পূর্ববর্তী স্তর থেকে সব আউটপুট ইনপুট হিসেবে নিয়ে যাবে। সর্বশেষ LSTM স্তর টেক্সটের লুকিয়ে থাকবে লেখার প্রতিনিধির প্রতিনিধি উৎপাদন করবে এবং তিন শ্রেণীবিভাগ কাজে তার এছাড়াও আমরা মডেল প্রদর্শনের উন্নতি করার জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্য লিখে রাখি। আমাদের মডেল ৭০.৫৪ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে (২/43 ভাষায়) সাবকাজ এ এবং ৪৯.', 'ca': "Detectar l'ironia és una tasca important per extrair informació fina a partir de missatges socials. Per tant, la tasca 3 del Semeval-2018 està destinada a detectar els tweets irònics (subtanya A) i els seus tipus irònics (subtanya B). Per abordar aquesta tasca, proposem un sistema basat en una xarxa LSTM densament connectada amb estratègia d'aprenentatge multitasca. En el nostre dens model LSTM, cada capa agafarà tots els productes de capes anteriors com entrada. L'última capa de LSTM produirà les representacions ocultes dels textos, i serà utilitzada en tres tasques de classificació. A més, incorporam diversos tipus de característiques per millorar el rendiment del model. El nostre model va aconseguir una puntuació F de 70,54 (puntuació 2/43) en la subtanya A i 49,47 (puntuació 3/29) en la subtanya B. Els resultats experimentals validen l'eficacia del nostre sistema.", 'az': 'ńįroni t…ôŇükil etm…ôk sosyal web mesajlarńĪndan m…ônim t…ômizl…ônmiŇü m…ôlumatńĪma vacib bir iŇüdir. Buna g√∂r…ô d…ô, yarńĪsńĪ-2018 g√∂revi 3-si ironik tweets (A subtask) v…ô ironik t√ľrl…ôri (B subtask) t…ôŇükil etm…ôk m…ôqs…ôdildir. Bu iŇüi √ß…ôkm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, √ßoxlu iŇüin √∂yr…ônm…ôsi stratejisi il…ô sńĪxńĪntńĪlńĪ LSTM Ňü…ôb…ôk…ôsind…ô olan bir sistemi t…ôklif edirik. Bizim yoxluq LSTM modelimizd…ô, h…ôr s…ôviyy…ô …ôvv…ôlki s…ôviyy…ôl…ôrd…ôn b√ľt√ľn √ßńĪxńĪŇülarńĪ giriŇü kimi alńĪr. Son LSTM s…ôviyy…ôsi m…ôtnl…ôrin gizli g√∂st…ôrilm…ôl…ôrini √ßńĪxardacaq v…ô onlar √ľ√ß s…ôviyy…ôd…ô istifad…ô edil…ôc…ôkl…ôr. ∆Źvv…ôlc…ô, modell…ôrin performansńĪnńĪ yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn bir ne√ß…ô n√∂v f…ôrqli f…ôrqli yaratdńĪq. Bizim modelimiz B subtask i√ßind…ô F-score 70,54 (s…ôviyy…ôd…ô 2/43) v…ô 49,47 (s…ôviyy…ôd…ô 3/29) s…ôviyy…ôd…ô baŇüa d√ľŇüd√ľ. ńįŇülem sonu√ßlarńĪ sistemimizin etkinlińüini t…ôsdiql…ôyir.', 'cs': 'Detekce ironie je důležitým úkolem pro těžbu jemných informací ze sociálních webových zpráv. Proto je úloha Semeval-2018 3 zaměřena na detekci ironických tweetů (podúkol A) a jejich ironických typů (podúkol B). Za účelem řešení tohoto úkolu navrhujeme systém založený na hustě propojené LSTM síti s víceúkolovou strategií učení. V našem hustém LSTM modelu převezme každá vrstva všechny výstupy z předchozích vrstev jako vstup. Poslední vrstva LSTM vytvoří skryté reprezentace textů a budou použity ve třech klasifikačních úlohách. Kromě toho zahrnujeme několik typů funkcí pro zlepšení výkonu modelu. Náš model dosáhl F-skóre 70,54 (hodnocení 2/43) v podúkolu A a 49.47 (hodnocení 3/29) v podúkolu B. Experimentální výsledky potvrzují efektivitu našeho systému.', 'fi': 'Ironian tunnistaminen on tärkeä tehtävä kaivaa hienojakoisia tietoja sosiaalisista verkkoviesteistä. Tämän vuoksi Semeval-2018 tehtävän 3 tavoitteena on tunnistaa ironiset twiitit (alatehtävä A) ja niiden ironiset tyypit (alatehtävä B). Tämän tehtävän hoitamiseksi ehdotamme järjestelmää, joka perustuu tiheästi yhdistettyyn LSTM-verkkoon ja jossa on monitehtäväoppimisstrategia. Tiheässä LSTM-mallissamme jokainen kerros ottaa kaikki aiemmat kerrokset syötteenä. Viimeinen LSTM-kerros tuottaa piilotetut tekstit, ja niitä käytetään kolmessa luokittelutehtävässä. Lisäksi meillä on useita ominaisuuksia mallin suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Mallimme saavutti F-pisteen 70,54 (sijoitus 2/43) alatehtävässä A ja 49,47 (sijoitus 3/29) alatehtävässä B. Kokeelliset tulokset vahvistavat järjestelmämme tehokkuuden.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje ironija je važan zadatak za moju novu informaciju iz socijalnih web poruka. Stoga je zadatak 3. polovijekova-2018 cilj otkrivanja ironičkih tweeta (podpitanja A) i njihovih ironičkih tipova (podpitanja B). Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem baziran na gustoj povezanoj LSTM mreži sa strategijom učenja multi task. U našem gustom LSTM modelu, svaki sloj će uzeti sve izlaze iz prethodnih slojeva kao ulaz. Posljednji LSTM sloj će izvesti skrivene predstave teksta, a oni će se koristiti u tri klasifikacijskog zadatka. Osim toga, uključivali smo nekoliko vrsta karakteristika kako bi poboljšali model izvršnost. Naš model je postigao F-rezultat od 70,54 (redak 2/43) u podpitanju A i 49,47 (redak 3/29) u podpitanju B. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg sistema.', 'et': 'Iroonia avastamine on oluline ülesanne sotsiaalsete veebisõnumite täpse teabe kaevandamiseks. Seetõttu on Semeval-2018 ülesande 3 eesmärk tuvastada iroonilised säutsud (alamülesanne A) ja nende iroonilised tüübid (alamülesanne B). Selle ülesande täitmiseks pakume välja tihedalt ühendatud LSTM võrgul põhineva süsteemi, millel on mitme ülesandega õppe strateegia. Meie tihedas LSTM mudelis võtab iga kiht sisendina kõik eelmiste kihtide väljundid. Viimane LSTM kiht väljastab tekstide peidetud kujutised ja neid kasutatakse kolmes klassifitseerimisülesandes. Lisaks sisaldame mudeli jõudluse parandamiseks mitut tüüpi funktsioone. Meie mudel saavutas F-skoori 70,54 (2/43) alaülesandes A ja 49,47 (3/29) alaülesandes B. Katsetulemused kinnitavad meie süsteemi efektiivsust.', 'ha': "Ina gane izni yana da wani aikin muhimma zuwa zan da tsari mai kyau daga manzannin samurai. Saboda haka, aikin Semewal-2018 na aimar a gane makarantin Twitter na jerin (sub-aikin A) da nau'i-jerin (sub-aikin B). Dõmin in bayyana wa wannan aikin, sai mu buɗa wata na'ura a kan wani shirin LTRM wanda aka yi haɗa da shi mai ƙunci na cikin shirin aiki masu yawa. cikin shirin LTRM mafi ƙaranci, kõwane zane zai ci duk fitarwa daga abun zaman kamar da za'a shiga. Gõdiya ta ƙarshe LTRM zai fitar da halin da aka ɓõye na rubutun, kuma za'a yi amfani da su cikin aikin daraja uku. Ina ƙara, Munã shigar da wasu irin na'ura dõmin ya kyautata performance misalin. Misalinmu ya sami wani F-score na 70.54 (ranked 2/43) a cikin sub-aikin A da 49.47 (ranked 3/29) a sub-aikin B. Matarin jarrabai yana da aikin na'ananmu.", 'sk': 'Odkrivanje ironije je pomembna naloga pri izkopavanju natančnih informacij iz sporočil na družabnem spletu. Zato je naloga Semeval-2018 3 namenjena odkrivanju ironičnih tweetov (podopravilo A) in njihovih ironičnih tipov (podopravilo B). Za reševanje te naloge predlagamo sistem, ki temelji na gosto povezanem LSTM omrežju s strategijo večopravilnega učenja. V našem gostem modelu LSTM bo vsaka plast vzela vse izhode iz prejšnjih plasti kot vhod. Zadnja plast LSTM bo izdala skrite predstavitve besedil, ki bodo uporabljene v treh opravilih klasifikacije. Poleg tega vključujemo več vrst funkcij za izboljšanje zmogljivosti modela. Naš model je dosegel F-rezultat 70,54 (2/43) v podnalogi A in 49,47 (3/29) v podnalogi B. Poskusni rezultati potrjujejo učinkovitost našega sistema.', 'he': 'לחקור אירוניה היא משימה חשובה למכרת מידע מעולה מההודעות האינטרנט החברתיות. לכן, המשימה החצי-2018 3 מתכוונת לזהות את הטוויטים האירוניים (subtask A) ואת הטיפוסים האירוניים שלהם (subtask B). כדי להתמודד עם המשימה הזאת, אנו מציעים מערכת מבוססת על רשת LSTM מחוברת בצורה צפופה עם אסטרטגיה ללמוד ממשימות רבות. במודל LSTM הצפוף שלנו, כל שכבה תיקח את כל התוצאות מהשכבות הקודמות כתוצאה. The last LSTM layer will output the hidden representations of texts, and they will be used in three classification task.  בנוסף, אנחנו מכילים מספר סוגים של תכונות כדי לשפר את ההופעה של המודל. הדוגמא שלנו השיגה נקודת F של 70.54 (מדרגה 2/43) בתחתית השאלה A ו-49.47 (מדרגה 3/29) בתחתית השאלה B. התוצאות הניסיוניות מאשרות את היעילות של המערכת שלנו.', 'jv': '#a11y <joanie> hello!<joanie> hello! Nanging, Samsul, Samsul-2013 task 3 dadi iki bakal ngetèkno ketemutan irronik (basa A) lan soko perbudhakan irronik (Subquestion B). Ngawe ngerti task iki, kita supoyata sistem sing basa ning titik online, di mbakdalakno yang karo multi-task lan sampeyan Jaringan drawable-action First letter Nambah, kita lagi butunggo ngerasakno sing dibutuhke butunggo ngerasakno model Awak dhéwé model nambah sing perusahaan F-scoosi sak 60.49 (ranger 2/49) ning pancening A lan 49.49 (ranger 3/30) ning pancening B. Ndéwé sing perusahaan sulayé, dadi kapan tanggal nggunaké awak dhéwé', 'bo': 'ཕོ་དམིགས་ནི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་ངའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ། དེར་བརྟེན། འཛམ་གླིང་ལྗངས་པའི་དུས་ལྗངས་༢༠༨་ཡིན་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་གྱི་ཕྱེད་འདོགས་པ་དང་། ཁོང་ཚོའི་གླེང་ས བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་སྤྱད་ནས་ང་ཚོས་མ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་པའི་LSTM་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་དགོས། In our dense LSTM model, each layer will take all outputs from previous layers as input. The last LSTM layer will output the hidden representations of texts, and they will be used in three classification task. ཁྱད་དུས་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མིག་སྔར་སྟོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་གཟུགས་འབྲི་ཚིག་གི F-score of 70.54'}
{'en': 'SemEval 2018 Task 4 : Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogues', 'ar': 'مهمة SemEval 2018 4: تحديد الشخصية في الحوارات المتعددة الأطراف', 'pt': 'SemEval 2018 Tarefa 4: Identificação de Personagens em Diálogos Multipartidários', 'es': 'Tarea 4 de SemEval 2018: Identificación de personajes en diálogos multipartidistas', 'fr': 'SemEval 2018 Tâche 4\xa0: Identification des personnages dans les dialogues multipartites', 'ja': 'SemEval 2018タスク4 ：複数当事者の対話における文字識別', 'hi': 'SemEval 2018 कार्य 4: बहुदलीय संवादों पर चरित्र पहचान', 'zh': 'SemEval 2018务4:多方言符', 'ru': 'SemEval 2018 Задача 4: Идентификация персонажей в многопартийных диалогах', 'ga': 'SemEval 2018 Tasc 4: Aitheantas Carachtair ar Chomhphlé Ilpháirtí', 'ka': 'SemEval 2018 დავალება 4: სიმბოლოების ინდიდენტიფიკაცია მრავალიო დიალოგიში', 'it': 'Task 4 di SemEval 2018: Identificazione dei caratteri nei dialoghi multipartiti', 'kk': '2018 жылдамдық тапсырма 4: Көптеген диалогтарда таңбалар идентификациясы', 'lt': '2018 m. pusmetis vertinimas 4 užduotis: daugiašalių dialogų simbolių identifikavimas', 'hu': 'SemEval 2018 4. feladat: Karakterazonosítás a többféles párbeszédekben', 'el': 'Εργασία 4: Αναγνώριση Χαρακτήρα σε Πολυκομματικούς Διάλογους', 'mk': 'SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogues', 'ml': 'സെമ്Eval 2018 Task 4: Multiparty Dialogues', 'mt': 'SemEval 2018 Kompitu 4: Identifikazzjoni tal-Karatteri dwar Djalogi Multipartiti', 'mn': 'SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogs', 'no': 'HalvEval 2018 oppgåve 4: Teikn- identifikasjon i fleirpartitdialogen', 'pl': 'SemEval 2018 Zadanie 4: Identyfikacja znaków w dialogach wielostronnych', 'ms': 'SemEval 2018 Tugas 4: Pengenalan Aksara pada Dialog Beberapa Parti', 'ro': 'SemEval 2018 Sarcina 4: Identificarea caracterelor în dialogurile cu mai multe părți', 'sv': 'SemEval 2018 Uppgift 4: Teckenidentifiering i flerpartsdialoger', 'sr': 'SemEval 2018 Task 4: Identifikacija karaktera u multipartijskim dijalogima', 'si': 'සේම්වේල් 2018 වැඩ 4: ගොඩපාර්ටි සංවාදයේ අක්ෂර පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'SemEval 2018 Shaqooyin 4: Character Identification on Dialog Multiparty', 'ur': 'سیم Eval 2018 ٹاکس ۴: ملٹی پارٹی ڈیلوگوں پر علامت شناسایی', 'ta': 'SemEval 2018 பணி 4: Multiparty உரையாடலில் எழுத்து அடையாளம்', 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ SemEvl bây giờ 4: Kí tự trên hộp thoại nhiều Đảng', 'uz': 'SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogs', 'hr': 'SemEval 2018 zadatak 4: Identifikacija znakova u multistranskim dijalogima', 'bg': 'Задача 4: Идентификация на знаците в многостранните диалози', 'id': 'SemEval 2018 Tugas 4: Identifikasi Karakter pada Dialog Multiparti', 'da': 'SemEval 2018 Opgave 4: Tegnidentifikation på flerpartsdialoger', 'nl': 'SemEval 2018 Taak 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogs', 'sw': 'SemEval 2018 Kazi 4: Utambulisho wa Character on Multiparty Dialogs', 'de': 'SemEval 2018 Aufgabe 4: Charaktererkennung in Mehrparteiendialogen', 'fa': 'عملۀ ۲۰۱۸ نیمه ۲۰۱۸: شناسایی شخصیت در محاورۀ چندیگری', 'tr': '2018 Görev 4: Karakter Kimliki on Multiparty Dialogs', 'sq': 'SemEval 2018 Task 4: Identification of Characters on Multiparty Dialogues', 'af': 'SemEval 2018 Taak 4: Karakter Identifikasie op Multiparty Dialoog', 'hy': 'ՍեմԷվալ 2018 Նորագրություն 4', 'am': 'Eval 2018 ስራ 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogs', 'bn': 'SemEval 2018 কাজ ৪: MultiPart Dialogueতে অক্ষর পরিচয়', 'bs': 'SemEval 2018 Task 4: Identifikacija karaktera o multipartijskim dijalogima', 'az': 'SemEval 2018 Gözəl 4: Multiparty Dialoglarında Karakter Kimlik', 'ko': 'SemEval 2018 퀘스트 4: 다방면 대화에서의 캐릭터 식별', 'fi': 'SemEval 2018 Tehtävä 4: Merkkien tunnistaminen monipuoluekeskusteluissa', 'ca': 'SemEval 2018 Task 4: Identification of Characters on Multiparty Dialogues', 'cs': 'SemEval 2018 Úloha 4: Identifikace znaků v dialogu s více stranami', 'et': 'SemEval 2018 Ülesanne 4: märkide identifitseerimine mitmepoolsetes dialoogides', 'he': 'SemEval 2018 משימה 4: זיהוי אופיינים על דיאלוגים רבים', 'sk': 'SemEval 2018 Naloga 4: Identifikacija znakov v večstranskih dialogih', 'ha': 'QWebPage', 'jv': 'Job', 'bo': 'ལོ་ཕྲང་ལྡོག་པ 2018 ལས་ཀ་གནང་བ་༤：རྩིས་འབྲུ་མང་བོའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་ལ་ཁ་སྟངས་འབྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Character identification is a task of entity linking that finds the global entity of each personal mention in multiparty dialogue. For this task, the first two seasons of the popular TV show Friends are annotated, comprising a total of 448 dialogues, 15,709 mentions, and 401 entities. The personal mentions are detected from nominals referring to certain characters in the show, and the entities are collected from the list of all characters in those two seasons of the show. This task is challenging because it requires the identification of characters that are mentioned but may not be active during the conversation. Among 90 + participants, four of them submitted their system outputs and showed strengths in different aspects about the task. Thorough analyses of the distributed datasets, system outputs, and comparative studies are also provided. To facilitate the momentum, we create an open-source project for this task and publicly release a larger and cleaner dataset, hoping to support researchers for more enhanced modeling.', 'ar': 'تحديد الشخصية هو مهمة ربط الكيان الذي يجد الكيان العالمي لكل ذكر شخصي في الحوار متعدد الأطراف. بالنسبة لهذه المهمة ، تم شرح الموسمين الأولين من البرنامج التلفزيوني الشهير Friends ، ويتألفان من إجمالي 448 حوارًا ، و 15709 إشارة ، و 401 كيانًا. يتم الكشف عن الإشارات الشخصية من الأسماء الاسمية التي تشير إلى شخصيات معينة في العرض ، ويتم جمع الكيانات من قائمة جميع الشخصيات في هذين الموسمين من العرض. هذه المهمة صعبة لأنها تتطلب تحديد الشخصيات التي تم ذكرها ولكنها قد لا تكون نشطة أثناء المحادثة. من بين أكثر من 90 مشاركًا ، قدم أربعة منهم مخرجات النظام وأظهروا نقاط القوة في جوانب مختلفة حول المهمة. كما يتم توفير تحليلات شاملة لمجموعات البيانات الموزعة ومخرجات النظام والدراسات المقارنة. لتسهيل الزخم ، أنشأنا مشروعًا مفتوح المصدر لهذه المهمة ونصدر علنًا مجموعة بيانات أكبر وأنظف ، على أمل دعم الباحثين لمزيد من النمذجة المحسّنة.', 'pt': 'A identificação do personagem é uma tarefa de vinculação de entidades que encontra a entidade global de cada menção pessoal no diálogo multipartidário. Para essa tarefa, são anotadas as duas primeiras temporadas do popular seriado Friends, totalizando 448 diálogos, 15.709 menções e 401 entidades. As menções pessoais são detectadas a partir de nominais referentes a determinados personagens do programa, e as entidades são coletadas da lista de todos os personagens dessas duas temporadas do programa. Essa tarefa é desafiadora porque exige a identificação de personagens que são mencionados, mas podem não estar ativos durante a conversa. Entre mais de 90 participantes, quatro deles enviaram suas saídas do sistema e mostraram pontos fortes em diferentes aspectos da tarefa. Análises completas dos conjuntos de dados distribuídos, saídas do sistema e estudos comparativos também são fornecidos. Para facilitar o impulso, criamos um projeto de código aberto para essa tarefa e lançamos publicamente um conjunto de dados maior e mais limpo, na esperança de apoiar os pesquisadores para uma modelagem mais aprimorada.', 'fr': "L'identification des caractères est une tâche de liaison d'entités qui permet de trouver l'entité globale de chaque mention personnelle dans un dialogue multipartite. Pour cette tâche, les deux premières saisons de la populaire émission Friends sont annotées, comprenant un total de 448 dialogues, 15 709 mentions et 401 entités. Les mentions personnelles sont détectées à partir de nominaux faisant référence à certains personnages de l'émission, et les entités sont collectées à partir de la liste de tous les personnages de ces deux saisons de l'émission. Cette tâche est difficile car elle nécessite l'identification des personnages qui sont mentionnés mais qui peuvent ne pas être actifs pendant la conversation. Parmi plus de 90 participants, quatre d'entre eux ont soumis leurs résultats système et ont montré leurs points forts dans différents aspects de la tâche. Des analyses approfondies des ensembles de données distribués, des sorties du système et des études comparatives sont également fournies. Pour faciliter cette dynamique, nous créons un projet open source pour cette tâche et publions un ensemble de données plus vaste et plus propre, dans l'espoir de soutenir les chercheurs pour une modélisation plus poussée.", 'es': 'La identificación de personajes es una tarea de vinculación de entidades que encuentra la entidad global de cada mención personal en el diálogo multipartidista. Para esta tarea, se anotan las dos primeras temporadas del popular programa de televisión Friends, que comprende un total de 448 diálogos, 15.709 menciones y 401 entidades. Las menciones personales se detectan de nominales que se refieren a ciertos personajes del programa, y las entidades se recopilan de la lista de todos los personajes en esas dos temporadas del programa. Esta tarea es desafiante porque requiere la identificación de los personajes que se mencionan pero que pueden no estar activos durante la conversación. Entre más de 90 participantes, cuatro de ellos presentaron sus resultados del sistema y mostraron puntos fuertes en diferentes aspectos de la tarea. También se proporcionan análisis exhaustivos de los conjuntos de datos distribuidos, los resultados del sistema y los estudios comparativos. Para facilitar el impulso, creamos un proyecto de código abierto para esta tarea y publicamos un conjunto de datos más amplio y limpio, con la esperanza de ayudar a los investigadores a mejorar el modelado.', 'ja': '文字識別は、マルチパーティダイアログで各個人の言及のグローバルエンティティを見つけるエンティティリンクのタスクです。 このタスクのために、人気のテレビ番組Friendsの最初の2シーズンには、合計448の対話、15,709の言及、401のエンティティからなる注釈が付けられています。 個人的な言及は、ショーの特定のキャラクターを指す公称値から検出され、エンティティはショーの2つのシーズンのすべてのキャラクターのリストから収集されます。 このタスクは、言及されているが会話中にアクティブでない可能性のある文字の識別を必要とするため、困難です。 90人以上の参加者のうち、4人はシステム出力を提出し、タスクに関するさまざまな側面で強みを示しました。 分散データセット、システム出力、および比較研究の徹底的な分析も提供される。 この機運を促進するために、私たちはこのタスクのためのオープンソースプロジェクトを作成し、より強化されたモデリングのための研究者をサポートすることを期待して、より大きく、よりクリーンなデータセットを公開します。', 'zh': '字符识是实体链接的一务,用于多方对话中查求每个人提及的全局实体。 热门电视节目《老友记》前注,凡448对15,709言401体。 人言从提及节目中某角色中检得之,而实体从该剧时所有角色者。 此事有挑战性,以其识言为言,或不活字符也。 在90多名参与者中,有四人提付其统输,并于任事各有优势。 又给对分布式数据集,统输较详。 为此一开源,显发一大净之数,冀得支治更强之建模。', 'hi': 'संप्रतीक पहचान इकाई को जोड़ने का एक कार्य है जो बहुदलीय संवाद में प्रत्येक व्यक्तिगत उल्लेख की वैश्विक इकाई को पाता है। इस कार्य के लिए, लोकप्रिय टीवी शो फ्रेंड्स के पहले दो सत्रों को एनोटेट किया गया है, जिसमें कुल 448 संवाद, 15,709 उल्लेख और 401 संस्थाएं शामिल हैं। व्यक्तिगत उल्लेख शो में कुछ पात्रों का उल्लेख करते हुए नाममात्र से पता लगाया जाता है, और संस्थाओं को शो के उन दो सत्रों में सभी पात्रों की सूची से एकत्र किया जाता है। यह कार्य चुनौतीपूर्ण है क्योंकि इसके लिए उन वर्णों की पहचान की आवश्यकता होती है जिनका उल्लेख किया गया है लेकिन वार्तालाप के दौरान सक्रिय नहीं हो सकते हैं. 90+ प्रतिभागियों में से, उनमें से चार ने अपने सिस्टम आउटपुट प्रस्तुत किए और कार्य के बारे में विभिन्न पहलुओं में ताकत दिखाई। वितरित डेटासेट, सिस्टम आउटपुट और तुलनात्मक अध्ययनों का पूरी तरह से विश्लेषण भी प्रदान किया जाता है। गति को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए, हम इस कार्य के लिए एक ओपन-सोर्स प्रोजेक्ट बनाते हैं और सार्वजनिक रूप से एक बड़ा और क्लीनर डेटासेट जारी करते हैं, जो अधिक उन्नत मॉडलिंग के लिए शोधकर्ताओं का समर्थन करने की उम्मीद करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Идентификация символов - это задача увязки сущностей, которая находит глобальную сущность каждого личного упоминания в многопартийном диалоге. Для выполнения этой задачи аннотируются первые два сезона популярного телешоу "Друзья", включающего в общей сложности 448 диалогов, 15 709 упоминаний и 401 сущность. Личные упоминания обнаруживаются по номиналам, относящимся к определенным персонажам в шоу, а сущности собираются из списка всех персонажей в этих двух сезонах шоу. Эта задача является сложной, поскольку она требует идентификации персонажей, которые упоминаются, но могут не быть активными во время разговора. Среди 90+ участников четыре из них представили свои системные результаты и продемонстрировали сильные стороны в различных аспектах задачи. Также проводится тщательный анализ распределенных наборов данных, выходных данных системы и сравнительных исследований. Чтобы облегчить импульс, мы создаем проект с открытым исходным кодом для этой задачи и публично выпускаем более крупный и чистый набор данных, надеясь поддержать исследователей для более совершенного моделирования.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i sainaithint carachtar ná tasc de nascadh aonáin a aimsíonn aonán domhanda gach lua pearsanta in idirphlé ilpháirtí. Maidir leis an tasc seo, tá nótaí curtha ar an gcéad dá shéasúr den chlár teilifíse a bhfuil an-tóir orthu Friends, ina bhfuil 448 dialóg san iomlán, 15,709 tagairt, agus 401 eintiteas. Braitear na tagairtí pearsanta ó ainmniúcháin a thagraíonn do charachtair áirithe sa seó, agus bailítear na heintitis ó liosta na gcarachtar go léir sa dá shéasúr sin den seó. Tá an tasc seo dúshlánach mar éilíonn sé go n-aithneofar carachtair a luaitear ach nach féidir a bheith gníomhach le linn an chomhrá. I measc 90+ rannpháirtí, chuir ceathrar acu a gcuid aschuir chórais isteach agus léirigh siad láidreachtaí i ngnéithe éagsúla den tasc. Cuirtear anailísí críochnúla ar fáil freisin ar na tacair shonraí dáilte, ar aschuir chórais, agus ar staidéir chomparáideacha. Chun an móiminteam a éascú, cruthaímid tionscadal foinse oscailte don tasc seo agus scaoilimid go poiblí tacar sonraí níos mó agus níos glaine, ag súil le tacú le taighdeoirí le haghaidh samhaltú níos fearr.', 'ka': 'Character identification is a task of linking entities that finds the global entity of each personal mention in multiparty dialog. ამ დავალებისთვის, პირველი ორი დონეები პოლიპური ტელეგი ქონის მეგობრები იქნებიან მონიტორებული, რომელიც 448 დიალოგიები, 15 709 წერტილებები და 401 ინტერტიები. პირადი ამოცანები მოიძებნა ნომინალიდან, რომელიც სხვადასხვა სიმბოლოების შესახებ სხვადასხვა სიმბოლოების შესახებ, და ინტერტიები ყველა სიმბოლოების შესახებ სხვადასხვა სი ეს დავალება შესაძლებელია, რადგან ის მოჭირდება სიმბოლოების განსაზღვრება, რომლებიც განსაზღვრებული, მაგრამ შეიძლება არ იქნება კონფიგურაციის დროში. 90+ სხვადასხვა მოთავსწავლებელი შორის შორის ოთხი თავის სისტემის გადასწავლა და დააჩვენეთ სხვადასხვა აპექტირებში ძალიან სხვადასხვა აპექტირებზე. გაყოფილი მონაცემების, სისტემის გადასვლების და შემდგომარებული კვლევების უფრო დანახვა. რომელიც მონექტუმის შესაძლებლობად, ჩვენ განხორციელი წიგნის პროექტის შექმნა ამ დავალებისთვის და უფრო დიდ და უფრო ფრთხოვრებული მონაცემების სექტის გახსნა, რომელიც მეტი', 'el': 'Ο προσδιορισμός χαρακτήρων είναι μια εργασία σύνδεσης οντότητας που βρίσκει την παγκόσμια οντότητα κάθε προσωπικής αναφοράς σε διάλογο πολλαπλών μερών. Για το σκοπό αυτό, σημειώνονται οι δύο πρώτες εποχές της δημοφιλούς τηλεοπτικής εκπομπής Φίλοι, που περιλαμβάνει συνολικά 448 διαλόγους, 15.709 αναφορές και 401 οντότητες. Οι προσωπικές αναφορές εντοπίζονται από υποψηφιότητες που αναφέρονται σε ορισμένους χαρακτήρες της εκπομπής και οι οντότητες συλλέγονται από τη λίστα όλων των χαρακτήρων στις δύο αυτές εποχές της εκπομπής. Αυτή η εργασία είναι πρόκληση επειδή απαιτεί τον προσδιορισμό των χαρακτήρων που αναφέρονται αλλά μπορεί να μην είναι ενεργοί κατά τη διάρκεια της συνομιλίας. Μεταξύ των συμμετεχόντων 90+ τέσσερις από αυτούς υπέβαλαν τα αποτελέσματα του συστήματος τους και έδειξαν ισχυρά σημεία σε διάφορες πτυχές της εργασίας. Παρέχονται επίσης διεξοδικές αναλύσεις των κατανεμημένων συνόλων δεδομένων, των εξόδων του συστήματος και των συγκριτικών μελετών. Για να διευκολυνθεί η δυναμική, δημιουργούμε ένα έργο ανοιχτού κώδικα για αυτό το έργο και δημοσιεύουμε δημόσια ένα μεγαλύτερο και καθαρότερο σύνολο δεδομένων, ελπίζοντας να υποστηρίξουμε τους ερευνητές για πιο βελτιωμένη μοντελοποίηση.', 'it': "L'identificazione dei caratteri è un compito di collegamento di entità che trova l'entità globale di ogni menzione personale nel dialogo multipartitico. Per questo compito, vengono annotate le prime due stagioni del popolare programma televisivo Friends, comprendente un totale di 448 dialoghi, 15.709 menzioni e 401 entità. Le menzioni personali sono rilevate dai nominativi che si riferiscono a determinati personaggi dello spettacolo, e le entità sono raccolte dalla lista di tutti i personaggi di quelle due stagioni dello spettacolo. Questo compito è impegnativo perché richiede l'identificazione dei caratteri menzionati ma potrebbero non essere attivi durante la conversazione. Tra oltre 90 partecipanti, quattro di loro hanno presentato i loro output di sistema e hanno mostrato punti di forza in diversi aspetti del compito. Vengono inoltre fornite analisi approfondite dei set di dati distribuiti, dei risultati del sistema e degli studi comparativi. Per facilitare lo slancio, creiamo un progetto open source per questo compito e rilasciamo pubblicamente un set di dati più ampio e più pulito, sperando di supportare i ricercatori per una modellazione più avanzata.", 'hu': 'A karakterek azonosítása olyan entitáskötési feladat, amely megtalálja az egyes személyes említések globális entitását a többpártos párbeszédben. Ehhez a feladathoz a Barátok népszerű műsor első két évadát jegyzeteltük, összesen 448 párbeszédből, 15 709 említésből és 401 entitásból álló. A személyes említéseket a sorozat bizonyos karaktereire utaló jelöltekből fedezik fel, az entitásokat pedig a sorozat két évadának összes karakterének listájáról gyűjtik össze. Ez a feladat kihívást jelent, mert szükségessé teszi a megemlített, de a beszélgetés során nem aktív karakterek azonosítását. A több mint 90 résztvevő közül négyen benyújtották a rendszer kimeneteit, és a feladat különböző aspektusaiban erősségeket mutattak. Az elosztott adatkészletek alapos elemzése, a rendszer kimenetei és összehasonlító tanulmányok is rendelkezésre állnak. A lendület megkönnyítése érdekében nyílt forráskódú projektet hozunk létre ehhez a feladathoz, és nyilvánosan kiadunk egy nagyobb és tisztább adatkészletet, remélve, hogy támogatni tudjuk a kutatókat a továbbfejlesztett modellezéshez.', 'lt': 'Žymelių identifikavimas – tai subjekto užduotis, susiejančio subjektą, kuris nustato visuotinį kiekvienos asmeninės nuorodos subjektą daugiašaliame dialoge. For this task, the first two seasons of the popular TV show Friends are annotated, comprising a total of 448 dialogues, 15,709 mentions, and 401 entities.  The personal mentions are detected from nominals referring to certain characters in the show, and the entities are collected from the list of all characters in those two seasons of the show.  Ši užduotis sudėtinga, nes ji reikalauja identifikuoti žymenis, kurie yra paminėti, bet gali būti neveiksmingi pokalbio metu. Iš 90+ dalyvių keturi pateikė savo sistemos rezultatus ir parodė įvairių užduoties aspektų stiprumą. Taip pat pateikiamos išsamios paskirstytų duomenų rinkinių, sistemos rezultatų ir lyginamųjų tyrimų analizės. To facilitate the momentum, we create an open-source project for this task and publicly release a larger and cleaner dataset, hoping to support researchers for more enhanced modeling.', 'kk': 'Таңбалардың идентификациясы - көп партиялық диалогында әрбір жеке айтқандарының жалпы нысанын табу нысандарының тапсырмасы. Бұл тапсырманың алғашқы екі уақытта ТВ шоудының друзерлері жалпы 448 диалогтары, 15 709 жазбалары және 401 бағдарламалары бар. Дербес жазбалар шоудың кейбір таңбаларына сәйкес келтірілген номиналдардан табылады. Бұл таңбалар көрсетілген екі уақытта барлық таңбалар тізімінен жинақталады. Бұл тапсырма көмектеседі, себебі ол айтқан таңбаларды идентификациялау керек, бірақ сұхбат кезінде белсенді емес болуы мүмкін. 90+ қатысушылар арасында төрті жүйелік шығысын жіберді және тапсырманың түрлі аспектерінде күшті көрсетті. Бөлінген деректер қорларының, жүйелік шығысының, және салыстырмалы зерттеулерінің тұрақты анализ қолданылады. Бұл тапсырманың көмегімен ашық көзі жобасын құру үшін және көпшілік үлкен және тазалау деректер жиынын шығару үшін, зерттеушілерді көбірек модельдіру үшін қолдау үшін кө', 'mk': 'Идентификацијата на знаците е задача на ентитетот кој се поврзува кој го пронајде глобалниот ентитет на секое лично споменување во мултипартискиот дијалог. За оваа задача, првите две сезони на популарното телевизиско шоу Пријатели се анотирани, вклучувајќи вкупно 448 дијалози, 15.709 спомени и 401 ентитети. Личните спомени се детектирани од номиналите кои се однесуваат на одредени ликови во шоуто, и ентитетите се собрани од листата на сите ликови во тие две сезони на шоуто. Оваа задача е предизвикувачка бидејќи бара идентификација на знаци кои се споменати но можеби не се активни за време на разговорот. Меѓу 90+ учесници, четири од нив ги поднесоа своите системски излези и покажаа силни сили во различни аспекти во врска со задачата. Исто така се обезбедени тешки анализи на дистрибуираните податоци, системски излези и споредливи студии. За да го олесниме поттикот, создаваме проект на отворен код за оваа задача и јавно објавуваме поголем и почист податок, надевајќи се дека ќе ги поддржиме истражувачите за подобрено моделирање.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan aksara adalah tugas entiti yang menghubungkan yang mencari entiti global setiap sebutan peribadi dalam dialog berbilang parti. Untuk tugas ini, dua musim pertama pertunjukan TV rakan-rakan terkenal dicatat, termasuk 448 dialog, 15,709 sebutan, dan 401 entiti. The personal mentions are detected from nominals referring to certain characters in the show, and the entities are collected from the list of all characters in those two seasons of the show.  Tugas ini mencabar kerana ia memerlukan pengenalan aksara yang disebut tetapi mungkin tidak aktif semasa perbualan. Di antara 90+ peserta, empat dari mereka menghantar output sistem mereka dan menunjukkan kekuatan dalam aspek berbeza mengenai tugas. Analisis teliti set data yang disebarkan, output sistem, dan kajian perbandingan juga diberikan. Untuk memudahkan momentum, kami mencipta projek sumber terbuka untuk tugas ini dan melepaskan secara awam set data yang lebih besar dan lebih bersih, berharap untuk menyokong penyelidik untuk model yang lebih berkembang.', 'ml': 'പലിപാര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ഡയലോഗില്\u200d ഓരോ സ്വകാര്യത്തിന്റെയും സ്വകാര്യത്തിന്റെയും പ്രസ്താവം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന സാധ ഈ ജോലിയുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ രണ്ട് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ട ടിവി ഷോ സുഹൃത്തുക്കളുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ രണ്ട് അവസരങ്ങള്\u200d വിഷമിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു മൊത്തം 448 ഡയലോഗിള്\u200d  കാണിക്കുന്ന കുറച്ചു അക്ഷരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്ന സ്വകാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ കാഴ് ഈ ജോലി വിലപിടിക്കുന്നു. കാരണം ഇതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് പറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന അക്ഷരങ്ങളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ് 90+ പങ്കാളികളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d, അവരില്\u200d നാലുപേര്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പുറത്ത് കൊടുത്തു ജോലിയെക്കുറിച്ച് വ്യത്യ വിതരണം ചെയ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെയും സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തുകളുടെയും പരിശോധനങ്ങളുടെയും പരിശോധനങ്ങളും ലഭ്യമാ ഈ ജോലിക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു തുറന്ന സോര്\u200dസ്സ് പ്രോജക്റ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുകയും, പ്രസ്താവികമായ ഒരു വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് പുറത്ത് വെക്കുകയും', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн тодорхойлолт бол олон партийн диалогт хэлбэрээр дэлхийн хүн бүрт нэрлэгддэг нэгж холбоотой нэгж юм. Энэ ажлын тулд алдарт хоёр хугацааны анхны хоёр цаг найзууд 448 яриа, 15 709 яриа, 401 бүтээгдэхүүн байдаг. Хүн төрөлхтний нэр тодорхойлолтуудыг шоу дээрх зарим дүрсийг харуулдаг нэр тодорхойлолтуудын нэр тодорхойлолтуудын тухай ологдож байна. Эдгээр бүх дүрсийг шоу дээрх хоёр цаг үед цуглуулдаг Энэ даалгавар нь хэцүү болж байна. Учир нь энэ нь ярианы үед хэрэглэгддэг хүмүүсийн тодорхойлолт хэрэгтэй ч байж болохгүй. 90+ оролцогчдын дотор дөрвөн нь системийн үр дүн гаргаж, ажлын талаар өөр өөр талаар хүчтэй байдлыг харуулсан. Даваагдсан өгөгдлийн сангууд, системийн үр дүнг, харьцуулалтын судалгаанууд мөн бүрэн шинжилгээ өгдөг. Хөдөлгөөнийг амжилттай болгохын тулд бид энэ ажил дээр нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн төсөл бий болгож, олон нийтэд том, цэвэрхэн өгөгдлийн санг нээлттэй болгож, судлаачидыг илүү хөгжүүлэх моделийг дэмжих гэж на', 'no': 'Teikn- identifikasjon er ei oppgåve til entitet som finn den globale entiteten av kvar personleg oppgåve i multiparty- dialogen. For denne oppgåva blir dei første to tidspunkta av den populære TV-visninga venner oppmerkte, som inneheld totalt 448 dialogar, 15 709 oppmerking og 401 einingar. Den personlege oppmerkinga vert oppdaga frå nominalene som refererer til nokre teikn i visninga, og einingane vert samla frå lista over alle teikn i desse to periodane i visninga. Denne oppgåva er vanskeleg fordi det krev identifisering av teikn som vert mengd, men kanskje ikkje er aktiv under samtalen. Mellom 90+ deltakarar har fire av dei sende systemutdata og viste styrke i ulike aspektar om oppgåva. Dette er også tilgjengelege rørre analyser av dei distribuerte datasetta, systemutdata og sammenlignbare studiane. For å letta momenten, oppretter vi eit opna kjeldeprosjekt for denne oppgåva og publiserer ein større og reiniger datasett, håper vi å støtta forskere for meir forbetra modellering.', 'mt': 'Character identification is a task of entity linking that finds the global entity of each personal mention in multiparty dialogue.  For this task, the first two seasons of the popular TV show Friends are annotated, comprising a total of 448 dialogues, 15,709 mentions, and 401 entities.  The personal mentions are detected from nominals referring to certain characters in the show, and the entities are collected from the list of all characters in those two seasons of the show.  This task is challenging because it requires the identification of characters that are mentioned but may not be active during the conversation.  Fost 90+ parteċipant, erbgħa minnhom issottomettew ir-riżultati tas-sistema tagħhom u wrew saħħa f’aspetti differenti dwar il-kompitu. Huma pprovduti wkoll analiżi bir-reqqa tas-settijiet tad-dejta distribwiti, ir-riżultati tas-sistema, u studji komparattivi. To facilitate the momentum, we create an open-source project for this task and publicly release a larger and cleaner dataset, hoping to support researchers for more enhanced modeling.', 'ro': 'Identificarea caracterului este o sarcină de legătură a entității care găsește entitatea globală a fiecărei mențiuni personale în dialogul multiparty. Pentru această sarcină, sunt adnotate primele două sezoane ale popularului serial TV Friends, cuprinzând un total de 448 de dialoguri, 15.709 mențiuni și 401 de entități. Mențiunile personale sunt detectate din nominalizări referitoare la anumite personaje din spectacol, iar entitățile sunt colectate din lista tuturor personajelor din cele două sezoane ale spectacolului. Această sarcină este dificilă deoarece necesită identificarea caracterelor menționate, dar care nu pot fi active în timpul conversației. Dintre cei peste 90 de participanți, patru dintre ei și-au prezentat rezultatele sistemului și au arătat puncte forte în diferite aspecte legate de sarcină. De asemenea, sunt furnizate analize aprofundate ale seturilor de date distribuite, rezultatele sistemului și studii comparative. Pentru a facilita impulsul, creăm un proiect open-source pentru această sarcină și lansăm public un set de date mai mare și mai curat, sperând să sprijine cercetătorii pentru o modelare mai îmbunătățită.', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga xarafka waa shaqo uu ku xiriirayo, kaas oo helaya dhamaanka caalamiga ah oo ku qoran diyaarinta kooxo kala duduwan. For this task, the first two seasons of the popular TV show Friends are annotated, comprising a total of 448 dialogues, 15,709 mentions, and 401 entities.  Macluumaadka shakhsiga ah waxaa laga ogaanayaa qofka loo sheegay qoraal cayiman oo lagu qorayo tusmada islamarkaasna waxyaabaha laga soo ururiyaa liiska labada xilli ee muusikada. Shaqadaasu waa mid dhibaataysan, sababtoo ah waxay u baahan tahay aqoonsiga lambarka la soo sheegay, laakiin marka la hadlo aysan shaqeyn karin. Qaar ka mid ah 90+ dadka ka qayb galay ayaa afartooda ka mid ah soo saaray soo baxayaasha nidaamka waxayna tuseen xoog badan oo ku saabsan waxyaabaha kala duduwan. Waxaa sidoo kale la bixiyaa baaritaanka kooban ee sameynta macluumaadka, bixinta nidaamka iyo waxbarashada isbardhiga. Si a an ugu fududeyno, waxaynu u abuurnaa shahaadan oo furan, waxaynu hadhuudhka u sii daahirinaynaa sawir macluumaad ka weyn oo daahirsan, waxaana rajaynaynaa in loo kaalmeeyo cilmi-baarayaasha tusaale ka sii kordhisan.', 'sv': 'Teckenidentifiering är en uppgift för entitetslänkning som hittar den globala entiteten för varje personligt omnämnande i flerpartsdialog. För denna uppgift kommenteras de två första säsongerna av det populära TV-programmet Friends, som omfattar totalt 448 dialoger, 15 709 omnämningar och 401 enheter. De personliga omnämnandena upptäcks från nomineringar som hänvisar till vissa karaktärer i serien, och entiteterna samlas in från listan över alla karaktärer i dessa två säsonger av serien. Denna uppgift är utmanande eftersom den kräver identifiering av tecken som nämns men kanske inte är aktiva under konversationen. Av över 90 deltagare lämnade fyra in sina systemresultat och visade styrka i olika aspekter av uppgiften. Grundliga analyser av distribuerade datamängder, systemresultat och jämförande studier tillhandahålls också. För att underlätta momentet skapar vi ett open source-projekt för denna uppgift och offentligt släpper en större och renare datamängd, i hopp om att stödja forskare för mer förbättrad modellering.', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja znaków jest zadaniem łączenia podmiotów, które znajduje globalny podmiot każdej osobistej wzmianki w dialogu wielostronnym. Do tego zadania zostały adnotacje pierwszych dwóch sezonów popularnego programu telewizyjnego Friends, składające się łącznie z dialogów 448, wzmianek 15,709 i podmiotów 401. Wspomnienia osobiste są wykrywane z nominałów odnoszących się do pewnych postaci w serialu, a jednostki są zbierane z listy wszystkich postaci w tych dwóch sezonach serialu. To zadanie jest trudne, ponieważ wymaga identyfikacji znaków, które są wymienione, ale mogą nie być aktywne podczas rozmowy. Wśród uczestników 90+ czterech z nich przedstawiło swoje wyniki systemowe i wykazało się mocnymi stronami w różnych aspektach zadania. Przedstawione są również dogłębne analizy rozproszonych zbiorów danych, wyników systemowych oraz badania porównawcze. Aby ułatwić rozwój, tworzymy projekt open source do tego zadania i publicznie publikujemy większy i czystszy zbiór danych, mając nadzieję wspierać naukowców w bardziej ulepszonym modelowaniu.', 'ta': 'பொருள் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ள அடையாளத்தின் செயல்பாடு ஒவ்வொரு தனிப்பட்ட உரையாடலில் உள்ள ஒவ்வொரு தனிப்பட்ட உரையாடலில் உள்ள இந்த செயலுக்கு, பிரபலமான தொலைக்காட்சி காட்சி நண்பர் காட்சியில் சில எழுத்துகளை குறிப்பிடும் பெயர்களிலிருந்து தனிப்பட்ட குறிப்புகள் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, மற்றும் பொருள்கள இந்த செயல் சவாலானது ஏனெனில் அது குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட எழுத்துக்கள் அடையாளம் தேவைப்படுகிறது, ஆனால் உரையாடல் போது செயல 90+ பங்கேடுபவர்களில் நான்கு அவர்கள் தங்கள் கணினியின் வெளியீடுகளை கூறினார்கள் மற்றும் வேலையில் வேறு விஷயங்களில்  பங்கிடப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளங்கள், கணினி வெளியீடுகள் மற்றும் ஒப்பீட்டு ஆய்வுகள் வழங்கப்படுகிறது. இந்த பணிக்கான திறந்த மூலம் திட்டத்தை நாம் உருவாக்கி பொதுவாக பெரிய மற்றும் சுத்தமான தரவுத்தளத்தை வெளியேற்றுகிறோம், அதிகமாக மேம்', 'ur': 'Character identification is a task of linking entity that finds the global entity of each personal mention in multiparty dialog. اس کام کے لئے پہلے دو فصل تلویزیون شاو کے دوستوں کو مشورہ کردیا گیا ہے، 448 صحبت میں، 15 709 صحبت اور 401 صحبت میں شامل ہوا ہے. وصیت یادہانی کو نمائش میں ایک قسم کے علائم سے پہچان دیا گیا ہے اور انٹیوں کو نمائش کے دو فصلوں میں تمام علائم کے لکھ سے جمع کیا جاتا ہے. یہ کام مشکل ہے کیونکہ یہ شخصوں کی پہچان کی ضرورت ہے جن کا ذکر کیا جاتا ہے لیکن بات میں فعال نہیں ہو سکتا۔ ان میں سے چار حضور اپنے سیسٹم کے نتیجے پیش کئے اور اس کام کے بارے میں مختلف طریقوں میں طاقت دکھائے۔ تقسیم ہوئے ڈاٹ سٹ، سیسٹم آئٹپوٹ اور مقایسات تحقیقات کے بہت سی تحقیقات بھی پیش کیے جاتے ہیں. اس موقعیت کو آسان کرنے کے لئے، ہم اس کام کے لئے ایک کھولتا سورس پروژہ بناتے ہیں اور عموماً ایک بڑا اور پاکیزہ ڈیٹ سٹ کو چھوڑتے ہیں، اس امیدوار ہے کہ بہت زیادہ مضبوط موڈلینگ کے لئے تحقیقات کرنے والوں کی مدد کریں.', 'si': 'අක්ෂර පරීක්ෂණය තමයි වැඩි පාර්ටි සංවාදයේ සංවාදයේ හැම ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙක්ම ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය සංවාදයේ ලෝකි මේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන්, ප්\u200dරධානය ටීවි ප්\u200dරදේශයේ පළමුවෙන් දෙකක් වෙලාවේ යාළුවන්ගේ යාළුවන්ගේ සංවාද 448 සංවාද, 15,709 සංව පුද්ගලික කියන්නේ ප්\u200dරදර්ශනයේ කිසිම අක්ෂර වලින් පරික්ෂා කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අක්ෂර වලින් ප්\u200dරදර්ශනයේ සියළු අක්ෂර වලින්  මේ වැඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා මොකද ඒකට කියන්න පුළුවන් අක්ෂර පරීක්ෂණය අවශ්\u200dයයි නමුත් කතාවයේ සක්\u200dරිය වෙ 90+ අංශයෙන් අංශයෙන්, ඔවුන් හතරයි ඔවුන්ගේ පද්ධතිය පිළිබඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප විදුලි දත්ත සැට, පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, සහ සම්පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණ අධ්\u200dයාවය සමග ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරති ඉක්මනය සහාය කරන්න, අපි මේ වැඩ සඳහා විවෘත ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරමයක් හොයාගන්න, ලොකු සහ සුදුසුම් දත්ත සැටියක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, විශ්වාස', 'sr': 'Identifikacija karaktera je zadatak entiteta povezivanja koja nalazi globalnu entitetu svakog ličnog spomena u multipartijskom dijalogu. Za ovaj zadatak, prva dva sezona popularne TV emisije prijatelji su annotirani, uključujući ukupno 448 dijaloga, 15 709 spomena i 401 entiteta. Lična spomena su otkrivena iz nominala koje se odnose na određene likove u predstavi, a entitate se skupljaju iz liste svih likova u te dve sezone predstave. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan jer zahteva identifikaciju karaktera koji se spominju, ali možda nije aktivan tokom razgovora. Među 90+ učesnika, četiri od njih su podnele rezultate sistema i pokazale snage u različitim aspektima o zadatku. Potvrđene su i detaljne analize raspodijeljenih podataka, rezultata sistema i usporednih studija. Da bismo olakšali momentum, stvorili smo projekt otvorenog izvora za ovaj zadatak i javno oslobodili veći i čišći set podataka, nadajući se da će podržati istraživače za poboljšanje modela.', 'uz': "Koʻproq muloqat oynasidagi har bir shaxsiy taʼminlovchi shaxsiy mavzuni topadi. Bu vazifa uchun, popular TV-sering birinchi marta ko'p vaqt do'stlarining birinchi vaqti, 448 dialog, 15,709 taxminan va 401 taxpaytlari bilan birinchi paydo bo'ladi. Shaxsiy xususiyatlarni koʻrsatishda bir necha belgi belgilangan nominalarda aniqlanadi, va obʼektlar koʻrsatiladigan ikki marta hamma belgining roʻyxatdan olingan. @ info: whatsthis 90+ ta'minlovchilarga aytganda, ulardan to'rttasi tizimning natijalarini joʻnatish va vazifa haqida boshqa narsalarda ko'rsatish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis To facilitate the momentum, we create an open-source project for this task and publicly release a larger and cleaner dataset, hoping to support researchers for more enhanced modeling.", 'vi': 'Nhận dạng ký tự là một nhiệm vụ của thực thể liên kết mà tìm thấy thực thể toàn cầu của mỗi sự đề cập cá nhân trong cuộc đối thoại đa đảng. Đối với nhiệm vụ này, hai mùa đầu của chương trình truyền hình nổi tiếng Bạn có ghi chú, gồm tổng bộ các ca thoại 48, 15,709 đã đề cập, và thực thể 401. Những dấu hiệu cá nhân được phát hiện từ các hiệu ứng có liên quan đến các nhân vật trong chương trình, và thực thể được thu thập từ danh sách các ký tự trong hai mùa diễn. Nhiệm vụ này khó khăn vì nó yêu cầu nhận diện các ký tự được đề cập, nhưng có thể không hoạt động trong suốt cuộc đối thoại. Trong số những người tham dự chương trình 99, bốn trong số họ đã cung cấp kết quả hệ thống và thể hiện những điểm mạnh trong các khía cạnh khác nhau. Chúng được cung cấp cả các phân tích dữ liệu phân phối, kết xuất hệ thống và các nghiên cứu tương đối. Để dễ dàng hơn, chúng tôi tạo ra một dự án nguồn mở cho nhiệm vụ này và công khai công khai phát hành một bộ dữ liệu lớn hơn và sạch sẽ, hy vọng có thể hỗ trợ các nhà nghiên cứu cho nâng cao mô hình.', 'bg': 'Идентификацията на знаците е задача на свързването на субектите, която намира глобалната същност на всяко лично споменаване в многостранен диалог. За тази задача първите два сезона на популярното телевизионно шоу Приятели са анотирани, включващи общо 448 диалога, 15 709 споменавания и 401 субекта. Личните споменания се откриват от номиналите, отнасящи се до определени герои в шоуто, а същностите се събират от списъка на всички герои в тези два сезона на шоуто. Тази задача е предизвикателна, защото изисква идентифициране на знаци, които са споменати, но може да не са активни по време на разговора. Сред 90+ участници четирима от тях представиха своите системни резултати и показаха силни страни в различни аспекти на задачата. Осигурени са и задълбочени анализи на разпределените набори от данни, системните изходи и сравнителни проучвания. За да улесним инерцията, ние създаваме проект с отворен код за тази задача и публично публикуваме по-голям и по-чист набор от данни, надявайки се да подкрепим изследователите за по-подобрено моделиране.', 'hr': 'Identifikacija znakova je zadatak entiteta povezivanja koja nalazi globalnu entitetu svakog osobnog spomena u multistranskom dijalogu. Za ovaj zadatak, prva dva sezona popularne TV emisije prijatelji su annotirani, uključujući ukupno 448 dijaloga, 15 709 spominjanja i 401 entiteta. Osobne spominje se otkrivaju iz nominala koje se odnose na određene znakove predstave, a entitate se skupljaju iz popisa svih znakova u tim dvije sezone predstave. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan jer zahtijeva identifikaciju znakova koje se spominju ali možda nije aktivan tijekom razgovora. Među 90+ učesnika, četiri od njih su podnele rezultate sustava i pokazale snage u različitim aspektima o zadatku. Potvrđene su i detaljne analize raspodijeljenih podataka, rezultata sustava i usporednih ispitivanja. Da bi olakšali momentum, stvorili smo projekt otvorenog izvora za ovaj zadatak i javno oslobodili veći i čišći set podataka, nadajući se da će podržati istraživače za poboljšanje modela.', 'da': 'Tegnidentifikation er en opgave med enhedsforbindelse, der finder den globale enhed for hver personlig omtale i flerpartsdialog. Til denne opgave er de første to sæsoner af det populære tv-show Friends annoteret, bestående af i alt 448 dialoger, 15.709 omtaler og 401 enheder. De personlige nævnelser opdages fra nominelle, der henviser til visse figurer i showet, og entiteterne er samlet fra listen over alle figurer i disse to sæsoner af showet. Denne opgave er udfordrende, fordi den kræver identifikation af tegn, der er nævnt, men muligvis ikke er aktive under samtalen. Blandt 90+ deltagere indsendte fire af dem deres systemoutput og viste styrker i forskellige aspekter af opgaven. Der gives også grundige analyser af de distribuerede datasæt, systemoutput og sammenlignende undersøgelser. For at lette momentum skaber vi et open source-projekt til denne opgave og offentliggør et større og renere datasæt i håb om at støtte forskere til mere forbedret modellering.', 'de': 'Die Charakteridentifikation ist eine Aufgabe der Entitätsverknüpfung, die die globale Entität jeder persönlichen Erwähnung im Dialog mit mehreren Parteien findet. Für diese Aufgabe werden die ersten beiden Staffeln der beliebten TV-Serie Friends kommentiert, die insgesamt 448-Dialoge, 15.709-Erwähnungen und 401-Entitäten umfassen. Die persönlichen Erwähnungen werden von Nominals erkannt, die sich auf bestimmte Charaktere in der Serie beziehen, und die Entitäten werden aus der Liste aller Charaktere in diesen beiden Staffeln der Serie gesammelt. Diese Aufgabe ist herausfordernd, da sie die Identifizierung von Charakteren erfordert, die erwähnt werden, aber während des Gesprächs möglicherweise nicht aktiv sind. Unter den 90+-Teilnehmern reichten vier von ihnen ihre Systemergebnisse ein und zeigten Stärken in verschiedenen Aspekten der Aufgabe. Umfassende Analysen der verteilten Datensätze, Systemoutputs und vergleichende Studien werden ebenfalls angeboten. Um das Momentum zu erleichtern, erstellen wir ein Open-Source-Projekt für diese Aufgabe und veröffentlichen öffentlich einen größeren und saubereren Datensatz, in der Hoffnung, Forscher für eine verbesserte Modellierung zu unterstützen.', 'nl': 'Karakteridentificatie is een taak van entiteitskoppeling die de globale entiteit van elke persoonlijke vermelding vindt in een dialoog met meerdere partijen. Voor deze taak worden de eerste twee seizoenen van de populaire tv-show Friends geannoteerd, bestaande uit een totaal van 448 dialogen, 15.709 vermeldingen en 401 entiteiten. De persoonlijke vermeldingen worden gedetecteerd van nominalen die verwijzen naar bepaalde personages in de show, en de entiteiten worden verzameld uit de lijst van alle personages in die twee seizoenen van de show. Deze taak is uitdagend omdat het de identificatie van personages vereist die genoemd worden, maar mogelijk niet actief zijn tijdens het gesprek. Onder 90+ deelnemers dienden vier van hen hun systeemoutputs in en toonden sterke punten aan in verschillende aspecten van de taak. Gedetailleerde analyses van de gedistribueerde datasets, systeemoutputs en vergelijkende studies worden ook verstrekt. Om het momentum te vergemakkelijken, creëren we een open-source project voor deze taak en publiceren we publiekelijk een grotere en schonere dataset, in de hoop onderzoekers te ondersteunen voor meer verbeterde modellering.', 'id': 'Character identification is a task of entity linking that finds the global entity of each personal mention in multiparty dialogue.  Untuk tugas ini, dua musim pertama pertunjukan TV populer Friends dicatat, termasuk total 448 dialog, 15.709 sebutan, dan 401 entitas. Sebutan pribadi ditemukan dari nominal yang merujuk pada karakter tertentu dalam pertunjukan, dan entitas dikumpulkan dari daftar semua karakter dalam dua musim pertunjukan itu. This task is challenging because it requires the identification of characters that are mentioned but may not be active during the conversation.  Among 90+ participants, four of them submitted their system outputs and showed strengths in different aspects about the task.  Analisis teliti dari set data yang didistribusikan, hasil sistem, dan studi perbandingan juga diberikan. Untuk memudahkan momentum, kami menciptakan proyek sumber terbuka untuk tugas ini dan publik melepaskan set data yang lebih besar dan lebih bersih, berharap untuk mendukung peneliti untuk model yang lebih berkembang.', 'ko': "캐릭터 식별은 실체 링크 임무로 여러 가지 대화에서 모든 사람이 언급한 전체적인 실체를 찾을 수 있다.이 임무에 대해 인기 텔레비전 프로그램인'노우기'의 전 두 시즌은 448개의 대화, 15709개의 언급과 401개의 실체를 포함한다.개인적인 언급은 프로그램에서 어떤 캐릭터의 이름에서 나온 것이고 실체는 이 두 시즌의 프로그램에서 모든 캐릭터의 목록에서 수집된 것이다.이 임무는 대화에서 언급되었지만 활발하지 않을 수도 있는 역할을 식별해야 하기 때문에 매우 도전적이다.참가자 90여명 중 4명은 시스템 출력을 제출했고 임무에 따라 우위를 보였다.분포식 데이터 집합, 시스템 출력과 비교 연구에 대한 전면적인 분석도 제공했다.이러한 추세를 추진하기 위해 우리는 이 임무를 위해 개원 프로젝트를 만들고 더욱 크고 깨끗한 데이터 집합을 공개적으로 발표하여 연구원들이 더욱 강화된 모델링을 할 수 있도록 지원하기를 바란다.", 'tr': 'Karkater kimligi multi-pärnöň dijalogda her şahsy diňe bir hedefi barlaýan bir zady dir. Bu zada üçin meşhur telewizoryň ilkinji iki meýdany Dostlaryň 448 dialoglary, 15,709 sany we 401 sany duýýarlar. Şahsy agzalary şov içinde belli karakterlere diýip atlandyrylýan nominallerden tapylýar we programiň ähli karakterlerniň listinden ýygnalýar. Bu täblik kynçylyk edip otyrýar, sebäbi ol diňe agzalan karakterleriň kimligi gerek, ýöne söhbet wagtynda aktiw bolmagy mümkin däl. 90+ iştirakçilerinden dört kişi sistemlerinin sonuçlarını gönderdi ve görev hakkında güçlü şekilde gösterdi. Bölünen veri setirleriniň, sistemiň netijesi we salyklaşyk studileriniň gowy analyzlary hem berilýär. Mobiliýany ýetişdirmek üçin bu zadyň üçin a çyk-kaynakly taslaýyşy bejerdik we umumy bejermek üçin uly we täze bir dataseti seredip otyrsak, arkadaşlaryň köpräk düzelenmegi üçin desteklemegini umyt edýäris.', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa wahusika ni jukumu la kuunganisha entity that finds the global entity of each person in dialogue multi. Kwa kazi hii, nyakati mbili za kwanza za za kipindi cha televisheni maarufu Marafiki wanaudhi, ikiwa ni pamoja na mazungumzo ya 448, majina 15,709, na vitu 401. Tamko binafsi zinagunduliwa kutoka kwa wateuzi wanaoihusu wahusika fulani katika kipindi hiki, na vitu vinakusanywa kutoka orodha ya wahusika wote katika kipindi hiki viwili cha kipindi hicho. Kazi hii inachanganya kwa sababu inahitaji kutambua wahusika ambao wanatajwa lakini inaweza kutokuwa na haraka wakati wa mazungumzo. Miongoni mwa washiriki 90+ Uchambuzi wa kina wa seti za data zinazosambazwa, matokeo ya mfumo na tafiti zinazolinganisha pia. Ili kusaidia muda huu, tunatengeneza mradi wa wazi wa kazi hii na kutoa hadharani seti kubwa zaidi na safi zaidi ya taarifa, kwa matumaini ya kuwaunga mkono watafiti kwa ajili ya mifano ya kuongezeka zaidi.', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i karakterit është një detyrë e njësisë që lidh që gjen njësinë globale të çdo përmendimi personal në dialogun shumepartik. Për këtë detyrë, janë shënuar dy sezonet e para të shfaqjes popullore të TV Shokët Shokë, duke përfshirë një total 448 dialogesh, 15,709 përmendime dhe 401 njësi. Kujtimet personale zbulohen nga nominalët që referohen në disa karaktere në shfaqje dhe njësitë mblidhen nga lista e të gjitha karaktereve në ato dy sezone të shfaqjes. This task is challenging because it requires the identification of characters that are mentioned but may not be active during the conversation.  Midis 90+ pjesëmarrësve, katër prej tyre paraqitën rezultatet e sistemit të tyre dhe treguan forca në aspekte të ndryshme rreth detyrës. Janë dhënë gjithashtu analiza të thella të të dhënave të shpërndara, rezultate të sistemit dhe studime krahasuese. Për të lehtësuar nxitjen, ne krijojmë një projekt burimi të hapur për këtë detyrë dhe publikisht lëshojmë një set të dhënash më të madhe dhe më të pastër, duke shpresuar të mbështesim kërkuesit për modelim më të përmirësuar.', 'af': "Karakter-identifikasie is 'n taak van entiteit wat koppel wat die globale entiteit van elke persoonlike nommer in multiparty dialoog vind. Vir hierdie taak is die eerste twee sezone van die populêre TV-wys vriende aangetel, wat 'n totaal van 448 dialoog, 15 709-menging en 401-entiteite bevat. Die persoonlike bepaalde bepaalde karakters in die vertoon word opgemaak van nominale, en die entiteite word versamel van die lys van alle karakters in daardie twee seine van die vertoon. Hierdie taak is uitgelyk omdat dit benodig die identifikasie van karakters wat geantwoord word, maar dalk mag nie aktief wees tydens die gesprek. tussen 90+ deelnimmers, vier van hulle het hul stelsel uitvoerdes ingestuur en sterkte in verskillende aspekte aangaande die taak vertoon. Die verspreidige datastelle, stelsel uitvoerdes en vergelykbare studie word ook verskaf. Om die momentum te eenvoudig, skep ons 'n open-bron-projek vir hierdie taak en openlik 'n groter en skoonmaaker datastel te verlos, hoop ons om resekers te ondersteun vir meer verbeterde modellering.", 'am': 'አቀማመጥ ለዚህ ስራ የሆኑት የቴቪዥን ሳጥን የመጀመሪያው ሁለት ሰዓት ወዳጆች ያደክማሉ፤ በሙሉ 448 ጥያቄዎች፣ 15,709 ማስታወሻ እና 401 አካባቢዎች እና አካባቢዎች አቅራቢዎች ናቸው፡፡ የግልኙነት ግንኙነቶች በማሳየቱ ውስጥ የተለየ አካላት እና አካላት ከታሪው በሁለቱ ሰዓት ውስጥ ከሁሉም ጽሑፎች ዝርዝር የተሰበሰቡ ናቸው፡፡ ይህ ስራ የሚያስተናክል ነው ምክንያቱም በተናገሩት ነገር ግን በአካባቢው ውስጥ የሚቻኮሉ የአካላት ግንኙነት ማረጋገጫ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ከ90+ ተጋሪዎች መካከል አራቱ የስርዓታቸውን ውጤቶች አቀልጠዋል፡፡ የዳታ ሳጥን፣ የስርዓት ውጤቶች እና ትካክል ትምህርት እና የተጨማሪው ትርጓሜ ደግሞ ነው፡፡ To facilitate the momentum, we create an open-source project for this task and publicly release a larger and cleaner dataset, hoping to support researchers for more enhanced modeling.', 'az': 'Karakter tanıdırması çoxlu parti diyalələrində hər kişin in ünvanlarının küresel ünvanını tapıb bağlayan bir şey işidir. Bu işə görə, məşhur televizyon göstərisinin ilk iki müddəti Dostların məlumatlarında 448 dialogların, 15 709 nəzərdə və 401 nəzərdə olan məlumatları məlumatlandırılır. Şahsiyyət adlandırmaları göstərisində bəzi karakterlərə bənzər nömrələrdən keçirilir, və bu nömrələr göstərisinin bütün karakterlərin listesindən toplanılır. Bu iş çətinliklə çəkilir, çünki bu söhbət vaxtında istifadə edilən karakterlərin kimliğini lazımdır, amma fərqli olar. 90+ iştirakçıların arasında, dördüncü sistemin sonuçlarını təbliğ etdi və işlər barəsində müxtəlif şəkildə qüvvət göstərdilər. Dağırılmış veri qurularının, sistemin çıxışlarının və salışdırılmış təhsimlərin də dərin analizi verilir. Möcüməni asanlaşdırmaq üçün bu iş üçün a çıq mənbə proyekti yaratdıq və daha çox modelləşdirmək üçün daha böyük və daha təmiz verilən quruluşu yayındırırıq.', 'fa': 'شناسایی شخصیت یک وظیفه\u200cای است که ارتباط ارتباط دارد که یک وضعیت جهانی از هر اشاره شخصی در محاورۀ چندیپارتی پیدا می\u200cکند. برای این وظیفه، اولین دو فصل برنامه تلویزیون محبوب به دوستان یادآوری می شوند که جمعیت 448 گفتگو، 15.709 یادآوری و 401 شرکت دارند. اشاره\u200cهای شخصی از نومینال\u200cها که به شخصیت\u200cهای خاص در نمایش اشاره می\u200cکنند شناسایی می\u200cشوند، و شرکت\u200cها از فهرست تمام شخصیت\u200cها در آن دو فصل نمایش جمع می\u200cشوند. این کار مشکل است چون نیاز به شناسایی شخصیت\u200cهایی است که به آن می\u200cگویند اما ممکن است در طول گفتگو فعال نشود. بین ۹۰+ شرکتگران، چهار نفر از آنها نتیجه\u200cهای سیستم خود را تسلیم کردند و نیروهای قوی در مورد کار مختلف نشان دادند. تحلیل عمیقی از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای تقسیم شده، نتیجه\u200cهای سیستم و مطالعه\u200cهای مقایسه\u200cگری هم پیشنهاد می\u200cشوند. برای آسانی کردن موقعیت، ما یک پروژه منبع باز برای این کار ایجاد می کنیم و عموما یک مجموعه داده های بزرگتر و پاکیزه تر را آزاد می کنیم، امیدواریم که محققان را برای مدل\u200cهای بیشتر پشتیبانی کنند.', 'hy': 'Նույների հայտնաբերումը առանձնահատկության առաջադրանքն է, որը կապում է այն առանձնահատկությունը, որը գտնում է յուրաքանչյուր անձնական նշումների գլոբալ առանձնահատկությունը բազմամաս For this task, the first two seasons of the popular TV show Friends are annotated, comprising a total of 448 dialogues, 15,709 mentions, and 401 entities.  The personal mentions are detected from nominals referring to certain characters in the show, and the entities are collected from the list of all characters in those two seasons of the show.  This task is challenging because it requires the identification of characters that are mentioned but may not be active during the conversation.  90-ից ավելին մասնակիցներից չորսը ներկայացրեցին իրենց համակարգի արդյունքները և ցույց տվեցին ուժեղ ուժերը խնդրի տարբեր ասպեկտներում: Thorough analyses of the distributed datasets, system outputs, and comparative studies are also provided.  To facilitate the momentum, we create an open-source project for this task and publicly release a larger and cleaner dataset, hoping to support researchers for more enhanced modeling.', 'bn': 'অক্ষর পরিচয় হচ্ছে একটি বস্তুর সংযোগ যোগাযোগের কাজ যা বহুপার্টি ডায়ালগে প্রত্যেক ব্যক্তিগত উল্লেখ করা বিশ্বের বৈশ এই কাজের জন্য জনপ্রিয় টিভি শো অনুষ্ঠানের প্রথম দুই মাত্র বিরক্তিত হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে মোট ৪৪৮ ডায়ালগ, ১৫,৭০৯ উল্লেখ এবং ৪০১ বিষয়। এই অনুষ্ঠানে নির্দিষ্ট অক্ষরের কথা উল্লেখ করা ব্যক্তিগত উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে এবং এই অনুষ্ঠানের দুই সময়ের সকল অক্ষরের তালিকা থেকে সংগ্রহ কর এই কাজ চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে কারণ এটি উল্লেখ করা চরিত্রের পরিচয় প্রয়োজন কিন্তু কথোপকথনের সময় সক্রিয় নয়। ৯০+ অংশগ্রহণকারীদের মধ্যে, তাদের মধ্যে চারজন তাদের সিস্টেমের আউটপুট জমা দিয়েছে এবং কাজের বিভিন্ন বিষয়ে শক্ বিতরণ করা ডাটাসেট, সিস্টেম আউটপুট এবং তুলনামূলক গবেষণা প্রদান করা হয়েছে। To facilitate the momentum, we create an open-source project for this task and publicly release a larger and cleaner dataset, hoping to support researchers for more enhanced modeling.', 'bs': 'Identifikacija karaktera je zadatak entiteta povezivanja koja nalazi globalnu entitetu svakog ličnog spomena u multipartijskom dijalogu. Za ovaj zadatak, prva dva sezona popularne TV emisije prijatelji su annotirani, uključujući ukupno 448 dijaloga, 15 709 spominjanja i 401 entiteta. Osobne spominje se otkrivaju iz nominala koje se odnose na određene likove u predstavi, a entitate se skupljaju iz liste svih likova u tih dva sezona predstave. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan jer zahtijeva identifikaciju likova koje se spominju, ali možda nije aktivna tokom razgovora. Među 90+ učesnika, četiri od njih su podnele rezultate sistema i pokazale snage u različitim aspektima o zadatku. Također se pružaju temeljne analize raspodijeljenih podataka, rezultata sustava i usporednih ispitivanja. Da bi olakšali momentum, stvorili smo projekt otvorenog izvora za ovaj zadatak i javno oslobodili veći i čišći set podataka, nadajući se da će podržati istraživače za poboljšanje modela.', 'ca': "L'identificació de caràcters és una tasca de l'entitat que enllaça que troba l'entitat global de cada menció personal en el diàleg multipartit. Per aquesta tasca, s'anoten les dues primeres temporades del popular programa de televisió Friends, compost d'un total de 448 diàlegs, 15.709 mencions i 401 entitats. Les mencions personals es detecten a partir de nominals que es refereixen a certs caràcters del programa, i les entitats es recollen de la llista de tots els caràcters d'aquestes dues estacions del programa. Aquesta tasca és desafiadora perquè requereix la identificació de caràcters que s'mencionen però potser no siguin actius durant la conversa. Entre 90+ participants, quatre d'ells van presentar els seus productes del sistema i van mostrar fortaleses en diferents aspectes de la tasca. Thorough analyses of the distributed datasets, system outputs, and comparative studies are also provided.  Per facilitar l'impuls, creem un projecte de codi obert per a aquesta tasca i publicam un conjunt de dades més gran i més netes, esperant ajudar els investigadors a millorar la modelació.", 'cs': 'Identifikace znaků je úkol propojení entity, který najde globální entitu každé osobní zmínky v dialogu vícestranných stran. Pro tento úkol jsou anotovány první dvě sezóny populárního televizního pořadu Friends, který obsahuje celkem 448 dialogy, 15,709 zmínky a 401 entity. Osobní zmínky jsou detekovány z nominálů odkazujících na určité postavy v seriálu a entity jsou shromážděny ze seznamu všech postav v těchto dvou sezónách seriálu. Tento úkol je náročný, protože vyžaduje identifikaci znaků, které jsou zmíněny, ale nemusí být aktivní během konverzace. Mezi 90+ účastníky předložili čtyři z nich systémové výstupy a ukázali silné stránky v různých aspektech úkolu. Důkladné analýzy distribuovaných datových souborů, systémových výstupů a srovnávací studie jsou také poskytovány. Abychom usnadnili dynamiku, vytvořili otevřený zdrojový projekt pro tento úkol a veřejně zveřejnili větší a čistší datovou sadu, doufáme, že podpoříme výzkumné pracovníky pro lepší modelování.', 'et': 'Märgi identifitseerimine on olemi linkimise ülesanne, mis leiab iga isikliku nimetuse globaalse olemi mitmepoolses dialoogis. Selle ülesande jaoks on märgitud populaarse telesaate Sõbrad kaks esimest hooaega, mis hõlmavad kokku 448 dialoogi, 15 709 mainimist ja 401 üksust. Isiklikud nimetused tuvastatakse etenduse teatud tegelastele viitavatest nominaalidest ja olemused kogutakse kõigi nende kahe hooaja tegelaste nimekirjast. See ülesanne on keeruline, sest see nõuab märkide identifitseerimist, mis on mainitud, kuid ei pruugi vestluse ajal aktiivsed olla. Rohkem kui 90 osalejast esitasid neli süsteemi väljundeid ja näitasid ülesande erinevates aspektides tugevaid tugevusi. Samuti on esitatud hajutatud andmekogumite põhjalikud analüüsid, süsteemi väljundid ja võrdlevad uuringud. Selleks et hoogu hõlbustada, loome selle ülesande jaoks avatud lähtekoodiga projekti ning avaldame avalikult suurema ja puhtama andmekogumi, lootes toetada teadlasi täiustatud modelleerimisel.', 'fi': 'Merkkien tunnistus on kokonaisuuksien linkittämisen tehtävä, joka löytää jokaisen henkilökohtaisen maininnan globaalin kokonaisuuden monipuoluedialogista. Tätä tehtävää varten tehdään huomautuksia suositun TV-ohjelman Friends kahdelle ensimmäiselle kaudelle, jotka käsittävät yhteensä 448 dialogia, 15 709 mainintaa ja 401 entiteettiä. Henkilökohtaiset maininnat havaitaan ohjelman tiettyihin hahmoihin viittaavista ehdokkaista, ja kokonaisuudet kerätään kaikkien näiden kahden kauden hahmojen luettelosta. Tämä tehtävä on haastava, koska se edellyttää sellaisten hahmojen tunnistamista, jotka mainitaan, mutta eivät välttämättä ole aktiivisia keskustelun aikana. Yli 90 osallistujasta neljä toimitti järjestelmätuotoksensa ja osoitti vahvuuksia tehtävän eri osa-alueilla. Lisäksi esitetään perusteellisia analyysejä hajautetuista aineistoista, järjestelmän tuotoksista ja vertailevista tutkimuksista. Edistääksemme vauhtia luomme tähän tehtävään avoimen lähdekoodin projektin ja julkaisemme julkisesti suuremman ja puhtaamman datajoukon toivoen, että tutkijat saisivat entistä paremman mallinnuksen.', 'jv': 'Karakter Sampeyan nganggo iki, sampeyan pangan sing sampeyan akeh populer TV ngomong Kemerdekaan dolanan sing berarti, akeh dumadhi kanggo langgar kanggo 488 dialog, liman. Display boxes task Jejaring politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ngawe kang ngejaraké perusahaan simbol, kita keweke nggawe perusahaan-perusahaan kanggo nggawe lan mbukake nggawe dataset sing luwih apik lan kelas, supoyo keamanan kanggo cerêter nggawe model sing luwih apik.', 'ha': "Shaidar farat-farat shine wani aikin shaidar abun da ke haɗa da shi, yana gano abun duniya da duk abun da aka faɗa ɗa cikin zauren mulki. Daga wannan aikin, farkon sau biyu na nuna wa mai popular TV na Friend ana zartar da su, mai ƙunsa da jumla na zauren akwatin bayani na 448, 15,709 da karatun 401. The personal mentions are detected from nominals referring to certain characters in the show, and the entities are collected from the list of all characters in those two seasons of the show.  Wannan aikin yana tsõratar da, dõmin ana buƙata bayani ga alama da za'a faɗaɗa, kuma amma ba za'a yi fara a lokacin da ake yi musu magana ba. Daga 90+ mãsu tãrayya, fire daga cikinsu suka sami matsala na'urarsu kuma suka nuna ƙarfi cikin masu cikin kashẽwar aikin. Ana ƙidãya ga fassaran database da aka raba su, da masu fitarwa na'ura da kuma masu yin daidaita. Ina iya amfani da kwamfyuta yanzu, za mu ƙiƙiro wani ma'aunin bayani wa wannan aikin na buɗa ɗe kuma mu sakar da kowace tsarin data masu girma da mai tsari, kuma munã kwaɗayin tamkar kwamfyuta masu ƙaranci.", 'he': 'זיהוי אופי הוא משימה של יחידה שקשורה שממצאה את היחידה הגלובלית של כל הזכרה אישית בדיולוג רב מפלגות. עבור המשימה הזאת, שתי העונות הראשונות של תוכנית הטלוויזיה הפופולרית חברים מוכתבים, כולל 448 דיאלוגים, 15,709 זיכרונות, 401 יחידות. הזכרונות האישיים מגיעים ממילים מתייחסים לדמויות מסוימות בתוכנית, והיחידות אוספות מרשימת כל הדמויות בשני העונות האלה של התוכנית. המשימה הזאת מאתגרת כי היא דורשת זיהוי של דמויות שמזכירות אבל אולי לא פעילות במהלך השיחה. Among 90+ participants, four of them submitted their system outputs and showed strengths in different aspects about the task.  ניתוחים משמעותיים של קבוצות המידע המפורסמות, יציאות מערכת, ומחקרים שיוותיים נותנים גם. כדי להקל את המנוע, אנו יוצרים פרויקט מקור פתוח למשימה הזאת ולשחרר בפומבי קבוצת נתונים גדולה יותר ונקיה, בתקווה לתמוך במחקרים למודילים משותפים יותר.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་འབྲུ་གཞུང་ནི་དབྱིབས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་མི་མང་ཆེ་རྣམས་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་ལག་ཁྱེར་གྱི་ཡོངས་རེ་ ལས་འགན་འདིའི་དོན་ལྟར་ཡོད་པའི་བརྙན་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཆུ་ཚོས་དང་པོ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད། The personal mentions are detected from nominals referring to certain characters in the show, and the entities are collected from the list of all characters in those two seasons of the show. བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་ལེན་དགོས་པ་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་དེ་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཀྱི་ངོས་འཛིན་དགོས་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་གཏམ་ག ཞུགས་སྡུད་མཁན་༩༠༠་ལས་དེ་བཞི་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་བྲིས་བ་རེད། དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག འུ་ཅག་གིས་དུས་ཆེན་ལ་ལས་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བའི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས། མ་མང་ཆེ་བའི་ཞིབ་ཆ་ཉེན་རྫན་དང', 'sk': 'Identifikacija znakov je naloga povezovanja entitet, ki najde globalno entiteto vsake osebne omembe v večstrankarskem dialogu. Za to nalogo sta navedeni prvi dve sezoni priljubljene televizijske oddaje Prijatelji, ki obsega skupaj 448 dialogov, 15.709 omemb in 401 entitet. Osebne omembe so zaznane iz nominalov, ki se nanašajo na določene like v oddaji, entitete pa so zbrane s seznama vseh likov v teh dveh sezonah oddaje. Ta naloga je zahtevna, saj zahteva identifikacijo znakov, ki so omenjeni, vendar morda niso aktivni med pogovorom. Med več kot 90 udeleženci so štirje predložili rezultate sistema in pokazali prednosti v različnih vidikih naloge. Zagotovljene so tudi temeljite analize porazdeljenih naborov podatkov, rezultatov sistema in primerjalne študije. Da bi olajšali zagon, ustvarimo odprtokodni projekt za to nalogo in javno objavimo večji in čistejši nabor podatkov, v upanju, da bomo podprli raziskovalce pri bolj izboljšanem modeliranju.'}
{'en': 'AMORE-UPF at SemEval-2018 Task 4 : BiLSTM with Entity Library', 'ar': 'AMORE-UPF في SemEval-2018 المهمة 4: BiLSTM مع مكتبة الكيانات', 'es': 'AMORE-UPF en SemEval-2018 Tarea 4: BilsTM con Entity Library', 'fr': 'AMORE-UPF au SEMEval-2018 Tâche 4\xa0: BilsTM avec Entity Library', 'pt': 'AMORE-UPF no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 4: BiLSTM com Biblioteca de Entidades', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のAMORE - UPFタスク4 ：エンティティライブラリを備えたBiLSTM', 'ru': 'AMORE-UPF на SemEval-2018 Задача 4: BiLSTM с библиотекой сущностей', 'ga': 'AMORE-UPF ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 4: BiLSTM le Leabharlann Aonán', 'zh': 'çˆ±èŒ‰èŽ‰-UPFåœ¨SemEval-20184:BiLSTMä¸Žå®žä½“åº“', 'hi': 'AMORE-UPF पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 4: निकाय लाइब्रेरी के साथ BiLSTM', 'ka': 'AMORE-UPF semiEval-2018 დავალება 4: BiLSTM Entity Library', 'el': 'AMORE-UPF στο έργο 4: με βιβλιοθήκη οντοτήτων', 'hu': 'AMORE-UPF a SemEval-2018 4. feladat: BiLSTM és Entity Library', 'it': 'AMORE-UPF al SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM con Entity Library', 'kk': 'AMORE- UPF жарым- 2018 тапсырма 4: BiLSTM Entity Library', 'lt': '4 užduotis: BiLSTM su subjektų biblioteka', 'mk': 'AMORE-UPF на SemEval-2018 задача 4: BiLSTM со библиотека на ентитети', 'ms': 'AMORE-UPF di SemEval-2018 Tugas 4: BiLSTM dengan Pustaka Entiti', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 4: എന്\u200dറിറ്റി ലൈബ്രറിയുമായി ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റിം', 'mn': 'AMORE-UPF at SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library', 'mt': 'AMORE-UPF f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 4: BiLSTM mal-Librerija tal-Entitajiet', 'no': 'AMORE-UPF på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 4: BiLSTM med Entity Library', 'pl': 'AMORE-UPF na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 4: BiLSTM z biblioteką Entity', 'ro': 'AMORE-UPF la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 4: BiLSTM cu Biblioteca Entităților', 'sr': 'AMORE-UPF na semiEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM sa bibliotekom entiteta', 'si': 'AMORE-UPF at semeval-2018 Job 4: BiLSTM with Unitity Book', 'so': 'AMORE-UPF at SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library', 'sv': 'AMORE-UPF på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 4: BiLSTM med Entity Library', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 ல் AMORE- UPF பணி 4: முதல் நூலகத்துடன் பில்ஸ்டிம்', 'ur': 'AMORE-UPF at SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'AMORE-UPF tại SemEvl-208 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library.', 'nl': 'AMORE-UPF op SemEval-2018 Taak 4: BiLSTM met Entiteitsbibliotheek', 'hr': 'AMORE-UPF na semiEval-2018 zadatku 4: BiLSTM sa bibliotekom entiteta', 'de': 'AMORE-UPF bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 4: BiLSTM mit Entity Library', 'id': 'AMORE-UPF at SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library', 'da': 'AMORE-UPF på SemEval-2018 Opgave 4: BiLSTM med Entity Library', 'bg': 'Задача 4: БиЛСТМ с библиотеката на субектите', 'sw': 'AMORE-UPF katika SemEval-2018 Kazi 4: BiLSTM na Maktaba ya Uhuru', 'ko': '2018년SemEval에서의 AMORE-UPF 퀘스트 4: 오프라인 라이브러리 BilSTM', 'sq': 'AMORE-UPF në SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library', 'tr': 'AMORE-UPF at SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'af': 'AMORE-UPF by SemEval-2018 Taak 4: BiLSTM met Entity Biblioteek', 'az': '칖miEval-2018 G칬z톛l 4: B칲t칲n Kitab캼 il톛 BiLSTM', 'bn': 'AMORE-UPF at SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library', 'hy': 'AMOrE-UPF-ը ՍեմԷվալ-2018-ի 4. հանձնարարությունը. Բիլսթմ առանձնահատվածների գրադարան', 'ca': 'AMORE-UPF a SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library', 'cs': 'AMORE-UPF na SemEval-2018 Úkol 4: BiLSTM s Entity Library', 'fa': 'AMORE-UPF در ماموریت ۲۰۱۸ کار ۴: BiLSTM با کتابخانه\u200cی ابتدایی', 'et': 'AMORE-UPF SemEval-2018 ülesanne 4: BiLSTM koos olemiteekoguga', 'fi': 'AMORE-UPF SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM ja entiteettikirjasto', 'bs': 'AMORE-UPF na semiEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM sa bibliotekom entiteta', 'jv': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'sk': 'AMORE-UPF na SemEval-2018 naloga 4: BiLSTM s knjižnico entitet', 'ha': 'AMORE UPF at Semevaal-2018 Task 4: BiLStM with Entity Libraries', 'he': 'AMORE-UPF ב SemEval-2018 משימה 4: BiLSTM עם ספריית Entity', 'bo': 'AMORE-UPF at SemEval-2018 Task 4: BiLSTM with Entity Library'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our winning contribution to SemEval 2018 Task 4 : Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogues. It is a simple, standard model with one key innovation, an entity library. Our results show that this innovation greatly facilitates the identification of infrequent characters. Because of the generic nature of our model, this finding is potentially relevant to any task that requires the effective learning from sparse or imbalanced data.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مساهمتنا الفائزة في مهمة SemEval 2018 4: تحديد الشخصية في الحوارات متعددة الأحزاب. إنه نموذج قياسي بسيط مع ابتكار رئيسي واحد ، مكتبة كيان. تظهر نتائجنا أن هذا الابتكار يسهل إلى حد كبير تحديد الشخصيات النادرة. نظرًا للطبيعة العامة لنموذجنا ، من المحتمل أن تكون هذه النتيجة ذات صلة بأي مهمة تتطلب التعلم الفعال من البيانات المتفرقة أو غير المتوازنة.', 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestra contribución ganadora a la Tarea 4 de SemEval 2018: Identificación de personajes en diálogos multipartidistas. Es un modelo simple y estándar con una innovación clave, una biblioteca de entidades. Nuestros resultados muestran que esta innovación facilita en gran medida la identificación de personajes poco frecuentes. Debido a la naturaleza genérica de nuestro modelo, este hallazgo es potencialmente relevante para cualquier tarea que requiera el aprendizaje efectivo de datos escasos o desequilibrados.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre contribution gagnante au SemEval 2018 Task 4\xa0: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogues. Il s'agit d'un modèle standard simple doté d'une innovation clé\xa0: une bibliothèque d'entités. Nos résultats montrent que cette innovation facilite grandement l'identification des personnages peu fréquents. En raison de la nature générique de notre modèle, ce résultat est potentiellement pertinent pour toute tâche nécessitant un apprentissage efficace à partir de données clairsemées ou déséquilibrées.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa contribuição vencedora para a Tarefa 4 do SemEval 2018: Identificação de Personagens em Diálogos Multipartidários. É um modelo simples e padrão com uma inovação chave, uma biblioteca de entidades. Nossos resultados mostram que essa inovação facilita muito a identificação de caracteres pouco frequentes. Devido à natureza genérica do nosso modelo, essa descoberta é potencialmente relevante para qualquer tarefa que exija o aprendizado efetivo de dados esparsos ou desequilibrados.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialoguesに対する当社の勝利への貢献について説明します。1つの重要なイノベーション、エンティティライブラリを備えたシンプルで標準的なモデルです。私たちの結果は、この革新がまれな文字の識別を大幅に促進することを示しています。私たちのモデルの一般的な性質のため、この発見は、まばらなデータまたは不均衡なデータから効果的な学習を必要とするタスクに潜在的に関連しています。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наш вклад в решение задачи 4 SemEval 2018: идентификация персонажей на основе многопартийных диалогов. Это простая стандартная модель с одним ключевым нововведением - библиотекой сущностей. Наши результаты показывают, что это нововведение значительно облегчает идентификацию редких персонажей. Из-за общего характера нашей модели, этот вывод потенциально имеет отношение к любой задаче, которая требует эффективного обучения на основе скудных или несбалансированных данных.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an méid a bhuaigh muid le SemEval 2018 Tasc 4: Aithint Carachtair ar Idirphlé Ilpháirtí. Is múnla simplí, caighdeánach é le príomh-nuálaíocht amháin, leabharlann aonáin. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go n-éascaíonn an nuálaíocht seo go mór le carachtair neamhchoitianta a shainaithint. Mar gheall ar nádúr cineálach ár múnla, d’fhéadfadh an toradh seo a bheith ábhartha d’aon tasc a éilíonn foghlaim éifeachtach ó shonraí tearca nó neamhchothromaithe.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2018 कार्य 4 में हमारे जीतने के योगदान का वर्णन करता है: बहुदलीय संवादों पर चरित्र पहचान। यह एक प्रमुख नवाचार, एक इकाई पुस्तकालय के साथ एक सरल, मानक मॉडल है। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि यह नवाचार बहुत कम अक्षरों की पहचान की सुविधा प्रदान करता है। हमारे मॉडल की सामान्य प्रकृति के कारण, यह खोज संभावित रूप से किसी भी कार्य के लिए प्रासंगिक है जिसके लिए विरल या असंतुलित डेटा से प्रभावी सीखने की आवश्यकता होती है।', 'zh': '本文引SemEval 2018务4:多方言符识获奖献。 其为法也,有一机而作,实体库也。 我们的结果表明,这创新极大地促进了不常见字符的识别。 凡我模通用性,或疏或否。', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την επιτυχημένη συνεισφορά μας στο έργο 4: Αναγνώριση Χαρακτήρα σε Πολυκομματικούς Διάλογους. Είναι ένα απλό, τυποποιημένο μοντέλο με μια βασική καινοτομία, μια βιβλιοθήκη οντότητας. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι αυτή η καινοτομία διευκολύνει σημαντικά τον εντοπισμό σπάνιων χαρακτήρων. Λόγω της γενικής φύσης του μοντέλου μας, αυτό το εύρημα είναι δυνητικά σχετικό με κάθε έργο που απαιτεί την αποτελεσματική μάθηση από ελάχιστα ή ανισόρροπα δεδομένα.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja nyertes hozzájárulásunkat a SemEval 2018 Task 4: Karakterazonosítás többpárt párbeszédekben. Ez egy egyszerű, szabványos modell, egy kulcsfontosságú innovációval, egy entitás könyvtárral. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy ez az innováció nagyban megkönnyíti a ritka karakterek azonosítását. Modellünk általános jellege miatt ez a megállapítás potenciálisan releváns minden olyan feladat szempontjából, amely szükségessé teszi a ritka vagy kiegyensúlyozatlan adatok hatékony tanulását.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის გამოსახულება ჩვენი მიღებული დამატება SemEval 2018 დავალება 4: მრავალიო დიალოგში სიმბოლოების განსახულება. ეს მარტივი, სტანდარტული მოდელია ერთი კლავის ინონოციაცია, ინტერტიკური ლიბერიკა. ჩვენი შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ ეს ინონოციაცია ძალიან უფრო მხოლოდ გამოყენებს შემდეგი სიმბოლოების განსაზღვრებას. ჩვენი მოდელის განსაკუთრებული ნათობით, ეს მონახვა პროცენტურად მნიშვნელოვანია ყველა დავალებისთვის, რომელიც ეფექტიური სწავლების შესაძლებლობად მონაცემების ან გან', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro contributo vincente a SemEval 2018 Task 4: Identificazione dei caratteri nei dialoghi multipartitici. Si tratta di un modello semplice e standard con un'innovazione chiave, una libreria di entità. I nostri risultati dimostrano che questa innovazione facilita notevolmente l'identificazione di caratteri rari. A causa della natura generica del nostro modello, questo risultato è potenzialmente rilevante per qualsiasi attività che richiede l'apprendimento efficace da dati scarsi o sbilanciati.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың semiEval тапсырмасына жеткізетін қатынасызды таңдайды: Көптеген партилер диалогындағы таңбалар идентификациясы. Бұл қарапайым, стандартты модель, бір кілттің инновациясы, нысандар жиындары. Біздің нәтижелеріміз осы инновация кейбір таңбаларды анықтауға көмектеседі. Біздің моделіміздің жалпы қасиетінің себебі, бұл табу мүмкіндігі кез келген тапсырмаға әсер етеді. Бұл тапсырма көлемі не тәуелсіздік деректерден үйрену керек', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų laimėtinas indėlis į 2018 m. SemEval 4 užduotį: ženklų identifikavimas daugiašaliuose dialoguose. Tai paprastas, standartinis model is su viena pagrindine inovacija – subjektų biblioteka. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad šios naujovės labai palengvina nedažnų ženklų nustatymą. Atsižvelgiant į bendrą mūsų modelio pobūdį, ši išvada gali būti svarbi bet kuriai uždaviniui, kuriam reikalingas veiksmingas mokymasis iš nedaug ar nesubalansuotų duomenų.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот победнички придонес за SemEval 2018 задача 4: Идентификација на знаци на мултипартиските дијалози. Тоа е едноставен, стандарден модел со една клучна иновација, библиотека на ентитетите. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека оваа иновација значително го олеснува идентификувањето на нечестите ликови. Поради генералната природа на нашиот модел, ова откритие е потенцијално релевантно за секоја задача која бара ефикасно учење од мали или нерамнотежни податоци.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan kontribusi menang kita ke SemEval 2018 Tugas 4: Identifikasi Aksara pada Dialog Berpartis. Ia adalah model sederhana, piawai dengan satu inovasi kunci, perpustakaan entiti. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa inovasi ini sangat memudahkan pengenalan aksara jarang. Kerana sifat generik model kita, penemuan ini berpotensi berkaitan dengan setiap tugas yang memerlukan pembelajaran efektif dari data yang sedikit atau tidak seimbang.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний ялагдсан нэр дэвшилтийг SemEval 2018 Task 4-д тайлбарлаж байна: Олон-партийн диалогуудын хамгийн тодорхойлолт. Энэ бол энгийн, стандарт загвар, нэг түлхүүр шинэчлэл, бизнесийн номын санг. Бидний үр дүнд энэ шинэчлэл нь бусад хүмүүсийн тодорхойлж чаддаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний загварын ерөнхий байдлын тулд энэ ололт нь ямар ч үйл ажилтай хамааралтай байж болох юм. Ямар ч үр дүнтэй суралцах эсвэл тэнцвэртэй мэдээллээс хэрэгтэй.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ വിജയം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 4-ലേക്ക് വിവരിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്: പല പാര്\u200dട്ടിക്ക് ഡയലോഗുകളിലെ അക് ഒരു താക്കോല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും ഒരു സാധാരണ ലൈബ്രറി നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ പ്രഭാവം പിന്നീട് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച അക്ഷരങ്ങളെ തിരിച്ച നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ സാധാരണ പ്രകൃതിയാല്\u200d, ഈ കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് സാധ്യതയുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-kontribuzzjoni rebbieħa tagħna għas-SemEval 2018 Kompitu 4: Identifikazzjoni tal-Karatteri dwar Djalogi Multipartiti. It is a simple, standard model with one key innovation, an entity library.  Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li din l-innovazzjoni tiffaċilita ħafna l-identifikazzjoni ta’ karattri mhux frekwenti. Minħabba n-natura ġenerika tal-mudell tagħna, din is-sejba hija potenzjalment rilevanti għal kwalunkwe kompitu li jeħtieġ tagħlim effettiv minn dejta żgħira jew żbilanċjata.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz zwycięski wkład w SemEval 2018 Task 4: Identyfikacja postaci w dialogach wielostronnych. Jest to prosty, standardowy model z jedną kluczową innowacją, biblioteką podmiotów. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że innowacja ta znacznie ułatwia identyfikację rzadkich postaci. Ze względu na ogólny charakter naszego modelu, ustalenie to jest potencjalnie istotne dla każdego zadania, które wymaga skutecznego uczenia się z rzadkich lub niezrównoważonych danych.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår vinnende bidrag til halvEval 2018 Oppgåve 4: Teikn- identifikasjon på fleirpartitdialogen. Det er ein enkel, standardmodell med ein nøkkelinnovasjon, ein entitetbibliotek. Resultatet våre viser at denne inovasjonen gjer stort tilgjengeleg identifisering av følgjande teikn. På grunn av den generelle naturen av modellen vår er dette finninga potensielt relevant for alle oppgåver som krev effektivt læring frå sparse eller ulike data.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie contribuția noastră câștigătoare la Sarcina 4 SemEval 2018: Identificarea caracterelor în dialogurile multipartit. Este un model simplu, standard, cu o inovație cheie, o bibliotecă de entitate. Rezultatele noastre arată că această inovație facilitează foarte mult identificarea caracterelor rare. Datorită naturii generice a modelului nostru, această constatare este potențial relevant pentru orice sarcină care necesită învățarea eficientă din date rare sau dezechilibrate.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pobjednički doprinos u zadatak 4. za semiEval 2018: identifikacija karaktera o multipartijskim dijalogima. To je jednostavan, standardni model sa jednim ključnim inovacijom, bibliotekom entiteta. Naši rezultati pokazuju da ova inovacija veoma olakšava identifikaciju neobičnih likova. Zbog generične prirode našeg modela, ovo otkriće je potencijalno relevantno za svaki zadatak koji zahteva učenje od rezervnih ili neravnoteženih podataka.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ ජයග්\u200dරහණය සම්පූර්ණය 2018 කාර්ය 4 වලට විස්තර කරනවා: ගොඩපාර්ටි සංවාදයේ අක්ෂර පරීක්ෂණය. ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය, ප්\u200dරමාණික නිර්මාණයක්, එක යතුරු නිර්මාණයක්, ඉන්තිත් ලායිබ්\u200dරේක්. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ අවස්ථාවය ගොඩක් සාධාරණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනවා කියලා. අපේ මොඩල් එකේ සාමාන්\u200dය ස්වභාවික ස්වභාවිතය නිසා, මේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran ku saabsan ku saabsan guulaysashada sanadkayada SemEval 2018 Shaqada 4: Isaqoonsiga xarafka ku saabsan diyaariyada xisaabta badan. Waa tusaale fudud oo caadi ah oo ay leedahay hal abuurid oo kaliya, maktabadda jidh. Abaalkayaga waxay muuqataa in abuuristan aad u caawinayo in la aqoonsado xarafta sababta ah. Because of the generic nature of our model, this finding is potentially relevant to any task that requires the effective learning from sparse or imbalanced data.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt vinnande bidrag till SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparts Dialogues. Det är en enkel standardmodell med en viktig innovation, ett entitetsbibliotek. Våra resultat visar att denna innovation i hög grad underlättar identifieringen av ovanliga tecken. På grund av modellens generiska karaktär är detta fynd potentiellt relevant för alla uppgifter som kräver effektivt lärande från glesa eller obalanserade data.', 'ta': 'SemEval 2018 செயல் 4: பல்கட்டி உரையாடல் மீது எழுத்து அடையாளம். இது ஒரு விசை புதுப்பித்தல், ஒரு உண்மையான நூலகத்துடன் எளிய, நிலையான மாதிரி ஆகும். Our results show that this innovation greatly facilitates the identification of infrequent characters.  எங்கள் மாதிரியின் பொதுவான பாதையினால், இந்த கண்டுபிடிப்பு சாத்தியமானது அல்லது ஒற்றைப்படையான தகவலிலிருந்து விரைவான கற்றுக', 'ur': 'This paper describes our winning contribution to SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogs. یہ ایک ساده، استاندارڈ موڈل ہے ایک کلیدی نوآوری کے ساتھ، ایک انٹیٹ لیبری ہے۔ ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ نوآوری بہت آسان ہے کہ اگلوں کے علائم کو پہچان سکتی ہے۔ ہمارے موڈل کی عمومی طبیعت کی وجہ سے، یہ پیدا کرنا ممکن ہے کہ ہر کام کے بارے میں اثرات کی تعلیم لینے کی ضرورت ہے جسے ذخیره یا غیر قابل تعلیم دی جاتی ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval 2018 Vazifa 4: Multiparty dialogidagi harfni aniqlash imkoniyatini anglatadi. Bu bir kalit ijodkorlik, entity kutubxonasi bilan oddiy, standard model. Our results show that this innovation greatly facilitates the identification of infrequent characters.  Modemizning genediy natur sababi, bu aniqlash imkoniyatini kichkina yoki imkoniyatli maʼlumotdan foydalanish kerak bo'lgan vazifaga muhim bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả sức mạnh của chúng ta cho nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác phần mềm 4: Ký tự trên hộp thoại Đảng. Nó là một mô hình đơn giản, tiêu chuẩn với một phát minh chủ chốt, một thư viện thực thể. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy sự phát triển này giúp việc nhận dạng những nhân vật hiếm có. Do mẫu của chúng ta mang tính chung, việc tìm kiếm này có khả năng liên quan đến bất kỳ nhiệm vụ nào cần học hỏi hiệu quả từ những dữ liệu tầm thường hay thiếu cân bằng.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft onze winnende bijdrage aan SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogues. Het is een eenvoudig, standaard model met één belangrijke innovatie, een entiteitsbibliotheek. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat deze innovatie de identificatie van zeldzame karakters aanzienlijk vergemakkelijkt. Vanwege het generieke karakter van ons model is deze bevinding potentieel relevant voor elke taak die effectief moet leren van schaarse of onevenwichtige gegevens.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores vindende bidrag til SemEval 2018 Opgave 4: Karakteridentifikation på flerpartsdialoger. Det er en enkel, standard model med én nøgleinnovation, et entitetsbibliotek. Vores resultater viser, at denne innovation i høj grad letter identifikationen af sjældne tegn. På grund af vores models generiske karakter er dette fund potentielt relevant for enhver opgave, der kræver effektiv læring af sparsomme eller ubalancerede data.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pobjednički doprinos u zadatak 4. iz polovice 2018. godine: Identifikacija znakova o višestranim dijalogima. To je jednostavan, standardni model sa jednim ključnim inovacijom, biblioteka entiteta. Naši rezultati pokazuju da ova inovacija veoma olakšava identifikaciju neobičnih znakova. Zbog generične prirode našeg modela, taj nalaz je potencijalno važan za svaki zadatak koji zahtijeva učinkovito učenje od rezervnih ili neograničenih podataka.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашия печеливш принос към задача 4: Идентификация на знаците в многопартийните диалози. Това е прост, стандартен модел с една ключова иновация, библиотека на обекти. Нашите резултати показват, че тази иновация значително улеснява идентифицирането на редки герои. Поради общия характер на нашия модел, тази констатация е потенциално релевантна за всяка задача, която изисква ефективно учене от оскъдни или дисбалансирани данни.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unseren erfolgreichen Beitrag zur SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogues. Es ist ein einfaches Standardmodell mit einer zentralen Innovation, einer Entitätsbibliothek. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass diese Innovation die Identifizierung seltener Zeichen erheblich erleichtert. Aufgrund der generischen Natur unseres Modells ist diese Erkenntnis potenziell relevant für jede Aufgabe, die effektives Lernen aus spärlichen oder unausgewogenen Daten erfordert.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan kontribusi kemenangan kita untuk SemEval 2018 Tugas 4: Identifikasi Karakter pada Dialog Multiparty. Ini adalah model sederhana, standar dengan satu inovasi kunci, sebuah perpustakaan entitas. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa inovasi ini sangat memudahkan identifikasi karakter tidak sering. Karena sifat generik model kita, penemuan ini berpotensi relevan untuk setiap tugas yang membutuhkan pengajaran efektif dari data yang sedikit atau tidak seimbang.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2018 임무 4: 다당 대화에서의 역할 식별에 대한 우리의 성공적인 공헌을 묘사한다.이것은 간단하고 표준적인 모델로 관건적인 혁신과 실체 라이브러리가 있다.우리의 결과에 따르면 이런 혁신은 보기 드문 문자의 식별을 크게 촉진시켰다.우리 모델의 통용성 때문에 이 발견은 희소하거나 불균형한 데이터에서 효과적인 학습을 해야 하는 모든 임무와 관련이 있을 수 있다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ دسترسی برنده\u200cی ما را به کار چهار سال ۲۰۱۸ توصیف می\u200cکند: شناسایی شخصیت\u200cها در محاورهای متعدد حزب\u200cها. این یک مدل ساده و استاندارد با یک نوآوری کلید، یک کتابخانه\u200cی شرکت است. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که این نوآوری بسیار آسان است شناسایی شخصیت\u200cهای غیرعادی. به خاطر طبیعت عمومی مدل ما، این پیدا ممکن است با هر کاری که نیاز به یادگیری موثر از داده های خالی یا نابرابری داشته باشد ارتباط داشته باشد.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons vinnige bydraag na SemEval 2018 Taak 4: Karakter Identifikasie op Multiparty Dialoog. Dit is 'n eenvoudige, standaard model met een sleutel innoasie, 'n entiteitbiblioteek. Ons resultate wys dat hierdie inovatie baie die identifikasie van onvolgende karakters gemaklik word. Omdat die generieke natuur van ons model is, is hierdie vinding potensieel relevant vir enige taak wat die effektief leer vereis van sparse of onbalanse data.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 2018 Görevi 4: Karakter Kimlikleri on Multiparty Dialogs Bu basit, standart nusga bir a çyk täzeleşigi bilen, bir entitet kitaphanesi. Biziň netijelerimiz bu täzelikden soňky karakterleriň tanyşlygyny örän aňsatdyr. Biziň modelimiň jeneral tebigaty sebäbi bu tapmak, netijeli ýa-da täsirli hereket eden öwrenmek gerekli işlerimize mümkin däldir.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan kontributin tonë fitues në SemEval 2018 Task 4: Identification of Characters on Multiparty Dialogues. Është një model i thjeshtë, standard me një inovacion kyç, një bibliotekë njësie. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se ky inovacion lehtëson në mënyrë të madhe identifikimin e karaktereve të pakufrektë. Për shkak të natyrës gjenerale të modelit tonë, ky gjetje është potencialisht e rëndësishme për çdo detyrë që kërkon mësimin efektiv nga të dhëna të pakta apo të paekuilibruara.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mchango wetu wa kushinda kwa SemEval 2018 Kazi 4: Utambulisho wa Kanisa kwenye Dialoga za Multiparty. Ni muundo rahisi na msingi wenye ubunifu mmoja, maktaba ya entity. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa ubunifu huu unawezesha kutambua tabia za msingi. Kwa sababu ya asili ya mifano yetu, utafuta huu una umuhimu wa kazi yoyote inayohitaji kujifunza ufanisi kutoka kwa taarifa za uchunguzi au wasio na usawa.', 'am': 'This paper describes our winning contribution to SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogues.  አንድ የቁልፍ አዲስ ፍጥረት፣ አካባቢ መዝገብ ፍጥረታችን ይህ አዲስ ፍጥረት የበለጠ አካላትን ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፡፡ በሞዴላያችን የgeneric ሥርዓት ምክንያት ይህ ማግኘት ከጥቂት ወይም በማስተካከል ከዳታ ጥሩ ማስተማር የሚያስፈልገውን ለማንኛውም ስራ የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր հաղթանակի ներդրումը 2018 թվականի "Սեմվալ 2018" հանձնարարության 4. առանձնահատկությունը բազմամասնության համար: Սա պարզ, ստանդարտ մոդել է, որը ունի մեկ կարևոր նորարարություն, էության գրադարան: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս նորարարությունը շատ ավելի հեշտացնում է հազվադեպ կերպարների հայտնաբերումը: Մեր մոդելի ընդհանուր բնույթի շնորհիվ այս հայտնաբերությունը պոտենցիալ կարևոր է ցանկացած խնդրի համար, որը պահանջում է արդյունավետ ուսումնասիրել քիչ կամ անհավասարակշռություն ունեցող տվյալներից:', 'bn': 'This paper describes our winning contribution to SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogues.  এটা একটি সাধারণ, স্ট্যান্ডার মডেল, একটি কী উদ্ভাবন, একটি বস্তু লাইব্রেরী। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে এই আবিষ্কার বেশী সুবিধা প্রদান করে যাচ্ছে অক্ষরের চিহ্নের পরিচয়। আমাদের মডেলের সাধারণ প্রকৃতির কারণে এই খুঁজে পাওয়া সম্ভবত যে কোন কাজের সাথে যোগ্য যার কারণে কার্যকর তথ্য থেকে শিক্ষা প্রয়োজন।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pobjednički doprinos u zadatak 4. za semiEval 2018: identifikacija karaktera o multipartijskim dijalogima. To je jednostavan, standardni model sa jednim ključnim inovacijom, biblioteka entiteta. Naši rezultati pokazuju da ova inovacija veoma olakšava identifikaciju neobičnih likova. Zbog generične prirode našeg modela, ovo otkriće je potencijalno relevantno za svaki zadatak koji zahtijeva učenje od rezervnih ili neravnoteženih podataka.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la nostra contribució guanyadora a SemEval 2018 Task 4: Identification of Characters on Multiparty Dialogues. És un model senzill i estàndard amb una innovació clau, una biblioteca d'entitats. Els nostres resultats mostren que aquesta innovació facilita molta identificació de personatges poc freqüents. Gràcies a la naturalesa genèrica del nostre model, aquest descobriment és potencialment rellevant a qualsevol tasca que requereix l'aprenentatge efectiu de dades escases o desequilibrats.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim qənimətimizi SemEval 2018 Görevi 4: Multiparty Dialogların Karakter Kimliğini təsdiqləyir. Bu basit, standart modelidir. Bir anahtar yenilənməsi, entitet kitabısı. Sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, bu yenilənmək sonrakı karakterlərin tanımasını çox asanlaşdırır. Modelimizin generiki təbiətinə görə, bu tapışma mümkün olaraq hər bir işə məxsusdur ki, istifadə edilmiş və ya müəyyən edilmiş məlumatlardan istifadə edə bilər.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš vítězný příspěvek na SemEval 2018 Task 4: Identifikace znaků na multistranných dialogech. Jedná se o jednoduchý standardní model s jednou klíčovou inovací, knihovnou entit. Naše výsledky ukazují, že tato inovace výrazně usnadňuje identifikaci vzácných znaků. Vzhledem k obecné povaze našeho modelu je toto zjištění potenciálně relevantní pro každý úkol, který vyžaduje efektivní učení z řídkých nebo nevyvážených dat.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse meie võitnud panust SemEval 2018. aasta ülesandesse 4: märkide identifitseerimine mitmepoolsetes dialoogides. Tegemist on lihtsa standardmudeliga, millel on üks oluline innovatsioon, olemi raamatukogu. Meie tulemused näitavad, et see innovatsioon hõlbustab oluliselt harvaesinevate tegelaste tuvastamist. Meie mudeli üldise iseloomu tõttu on see leid potentsiaalselt asjakohane iga ülesande puhul, mis nõuab tõhusat õppimist hõredatest või tasakaalustamatutest andmetest.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli kuvaa voittanutta panostamme SemEval 2018 Task 4: Character Identification on Multiparty Dialogues -ohjelmaan. Se on yksinkertainen, vakiomalli, jossa on yksi keskeinen innovaatio, kokonaisuuskirjasto. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että tämä innovaatio helpottaa huomattavasti harvinaisten hahmojen tunnistamista. Mallimme yleisluonteen vuoksi tämä havainto voi olla relevantti missä tahansa tehtävässä, joka vaatii tehokasta oppimista niukasta tai epätasapainoisesta datasta.', 'jv': 'Samsul FindOK Rejalaké awak dhéwé menehi winih-winih iki luwih apik perusahaan kanggo nguasar caratar sing dikarepaké. Soalé kabèh sistem generic sing model awak dhéwé, akeh mbukak iki ngono kuwi kesempatan kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan layar-sistem sing bisa diutag-sistem sing gak dhéwé.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את התרומה הנצחית שלנו לסימוול 2018 משימה 4: זיהוי אופי על דיאלוגים רבים. זה מודל פשוט, סטנדרטי עם חדשות מפתח אחת, ספריית ישויות. התוצאות שלנו מראות שהחדשות הזו מקדימות באופן גדול את זיהוי דמויות נדירות. בגלל הטבע הכללי של המודל שלנו, הממצא הזה פוטנציאלי רלוונטי לכל משימה שדורשת ללמוד יעיל ממידע נדיר או לא מאוזן.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš zmagovalni prispevek k nalogi 4 SemEval 2018: identifikacija znakov v večstrankarskih dialogih. Gre za preprost, standardni model z eno ključno inovacijo, knjižnico entitet. Naši rezultati kažejo, da ta inovacija močno olajša identifikacijo redkih znakov. Zaradi splošne narave našega modela je ta ugotovitev potencialno pomembna za vsako nalogo, ki zahteva učinkovito učenje iz redkih ali neravnoteženih podatkov.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana fassarar da muka rinjãya zuwa SemEl 2018 Tafiyar 4: Character ID on multi-batalo Dialog. @ item: inmenu MatamayinMu na nũna cewa wannan innunin yana mai amfani da ganin karatun masu baka. Dukan mazan kwamfyutan misalinmu, wannan na gane yana mai amfani ga wani aikin da ke nufin an sanar da masu da amfani daga danne masu ƙaranci ko da za'a daidaita.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གུས་མཐུན་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་པ་(SemEval 2018 Task 4)ནང་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། It is a simple, standard model with one key innovation, an entity library. ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་འབྲས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་གསར་གཏོད་འདིས་གཞན་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྟོགས་ཆེ་བ་སླ་གཏོང་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ན། རྙེད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་བྱ་བ་གང་རུང་ལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་པའི་སྐྱོན་རྐྱེན་ག'}
{'en': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5 : Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'pt': 'KOI no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 5: Construindo o Gráfico de Conhecimento de Incidentes', 'ar': 'KOI في SemEval-2018 المهمة 5: بناء الرسم البياني المعرفي للحوادث', 'fr': 'KOI à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 5\xa0: Construire un graphique de connaissances sur les incidents', 'es': 'KOI en SemEval-2018 Tarea 5: Creación de un gráfico de conocimiento de incidentes', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のKOIタスク5 ：インシデントの知識の構築グラフ', 'zh': 'KOI在SemEval-2018务5:立事知图谱', 'ru': 'KOI на SemEval-2018 Задача 5: Построение графика знаний об инцидентах', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2018 कार्य 5 में KOI: घटनाओं के ज्ञान ग्राफ का निर्माण', 'ga': 'KOI ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 5: Ag Tógáil Graf Eolais ar Theagmhais', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Κατασκευή Γραφείου Γνώσης συμβάντων', 'hu': 'KOI a SemEval-2018 5. feladat: Az események ismeretgrafikájának építése', 'it': 'KOI al SemEval-2018 Task 5: Costruire il grafico della conoscenza degli incidenti', 'lt': 'KOI 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 5 uždavinys: žinių apie incidentus kūrimas', 'mk': 'KOI на SemEval-2018 задача 5: Градење на график на знаење за инциденти', 'kk': 'Оқиғалардың білім графигін құру', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 5- ലെ കെയില്\u200d: അനുഭവങ്ങളുടെ അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'KOI ved semiEval- 2018 oppgåve 5: Bygging av kjennomsnittgrafikk av hendingar', 'mn': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'ms': 'KOI di SemEval-2018 Tugas 5: Bina Graf Pengetahuan Kejadian', 'pl': 'KOI na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 5: Budowanie wykresu wiedzy incydentów', 'ro': 'KOI la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 5: Construirea graficului cunoștințelor incidentelor', 'mt': 'KOI f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 5: Bini ta’ Grafika tal-Għarfien ta’ Inċidenti', 'sr': 'KOI na semiEval-2018 zadatku 5: izgradnja znanstvenog grafika incidenata', 'si': 'KOI at semeval-2018 Job 5: building KnowKnowKnowKnowKnow Graph of Incendents', 'so': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'sv': 'KOI på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 5: Att bygga kunskapsdiagram över händelser', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 5: நிகழ்வுகளின் அறிவு வரைபடம் கட்டுதல்', 'ur': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'vi': 'KOI at SemEvl-208 Task 5: đồ họa về kiến thức của sự cố tình', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Изграждане на графика на знанието за инциденти', 'hr': 'KOI na semiEval-2018 zadatku 5: izgradnja znanstvenog grafika nesreća', 'nl': 'KOI op SemEval-2018 Taak 5: Knowledge Graph of Incidents bouwen', 'da': 'KOI på SemEval-2018 Opgave 5: Opbygning af vidensdiagram over hændelser', 'de': 'KOI bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 5: Aufbau eines Wissensdiagramms von Vorfällen', 'id': 'KOI di SemEval-2018 Tugas 5: Membangun Graf Pengetahuan Kejadian', 'ko': 'KOI가 SemEval-18 퀘스트 5: 이벤트 지식도 구축', 'fa': 'KOI در تابع ۲۰۱۸: ساختن گراف دانش حادثه\u200cها', 'sw': 'KOI katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 5: Ujengaji Grafu ya Ujuzi wa Matukio', 'tr': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'af': 'Koi by SemEval- 2018 Taak 5: bou kennis graf van inkidente', 'sq': 'KOI në SemEval-2018 Taska 5: Ndërtimi i grafikut të njohurive të incidenteve', 'hy': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'am': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'az': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'bs': 'KOI na semiEval-2018 zadatku 5: izgradnja znanstvenog grafika nesreća', 'cs': 'KOI na SemEval-2018 Úkol 5: Budování znalostního grafu incidentů', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮-এর কাজ ৫: দুর্ঘটনার জ্ঞান গ্রাফ নির্মাণ করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'KOI SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 5: Juhtumite teadmiste graafiku loomine', 'fi': 'KOI SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'ca': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'ha': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'jv': 'KoI nang semebal-2008 task 5: Bining knowknowknowknowknowness Graph of Includts', 'he': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'bo': 'KOI at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Building Knowledge Graph of Incidents', 'sk': 'KOI na SemEval-2018 Naloga 5: Gradnja grafika znanja o incidentih'}
{'en': 'We present KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), a system that given news articles as input, builds a knowledge graph (KOI-KG) of incidental events. KOI-KG can then be used to efficiently answer questions such How many killing incidents happened in 2017 that involve Sean? The required steps in building the KG include : (i) document preprocessing involving word sense disambiguation, named-entity recognition, temporal expression recognition and normalization, and semantic role labeling ; (ii) incidental event extraction and coreference resolution via document clustering ; and (iii) KG construction and population.', 'ar': 'نقدم KOI (المعرفة بالحوادث) ، وهو نظام يقدم المقالات الإخبارية كمدخلات ، ويبني رسمًا بيانيًا معرفيًا (KOI-KG) للأحداث العرضية. يمكن بعد ذلك استخدام KOI-KG للإجابة بكفاءة على أسئلة مثل "كم عدد حوادث القتل التي حدثت في عام 2017 والتي شملت شون؟" تشمل الخطوات المطلوبة في بناء KG ما يلي: (1) معالجة المستندات التي تتضمن إزالة الغموض عن معنى الكلمة ، والتعرف على الكيانات المسماة ، والتعرف على التعبير الزمني والتطبيع ، ووضع العلامات على الدور الدلالي ؛ (2) استخراج الأحداث العرضية وتسوية المرجع من خلال تجميع المستندات ؛ و (3) بناء رياض الأطفال والسكان.', 'fr': "Nous présentons KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), un système qui fournit des articles de presse en entrée, construit un graphe de connaissances (KOI-KG) des événements fortuits. KOI-KG peut ensuite être utilisé pour répondre efficacement à des questions telles que «\xa0Combien d'incidents meurtriers impliquant Sean se sont produits en 2017\xa0?\xa0» Les étapes requises pour construire le KG comprennent\xa0: (i) le prétraitement des documents impliquant la désambiguïsation du sens des mots, la reconnaissance d'entités nommées, la reconnaissance et la normalisation des expressions temporelles et l'étiquetage des rôles sémantiques\xa0; (ii) l'extraction d'événements fortuits et la résolution de coréférence via le regroupement de documents\xa0; et (iii) KG du bâtiment et de la population.", 'es': 'Presentamos KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), un sistema que, dado artículos de noticias como entrada, construye un gráfico de conocimiento (KOI-KG) de eventos incidentales. KOI-KG se puede utilizar para responder de manera eficiente a preguntas como «¿Cuántos incidentes de asesinato ocurrieron en 2017 que involucran a Sean?» Los pasos necesarios para construir el KG incluyen: (i) el preprocesamiento de documentos que implica la desambiguación del sentido de las palabras, el reconocimiento de la entidad nombrada, el reconocimiento y la normalización de expresiones temporales y el etiquetado de roles semánticos; (ii) la extracción de eventos incidentales y la resolución de correferencias a través de la agrupación de documentos; y (iii) KG construcción y población.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), um sistema que, a partir de artigos de notícias como entrada, constrói um gráfico de conhecimento (KOI-KG) de eventos incidentais. O KOI-KG pode então ser usado para responder com eficiência a perguntas como “Quantos incidentes de assassinato aconteceram em 2017 que envolvem Sean?” As etapas necessárias na construção do KG incluem: (i) pré-processamento de documentos envolvendo desambiguação de sentido de palavra, reconhecimento de entidade nomeada, reconhecimento e normalização de expressão temporal e rotulagem de papel semântico; (ii) extração de eventos incidentais e resolução de correferências via agrupamento de documentos; e (iii) KG construção e população.', 'ja': '私たちは、ニュース記事を入力として与え、偶発的な事象の知識グラフ（ KOI - KG ）を構築するシステムであるKOI （ Knowledge of Incidents ）を提示します。KOI - KGは、次のような質問に効率的に答えるために使用できます。「ショーンが関与した2017年に何件の殺人事件が発生しましたか？ ”KGを構築するために必要なステップには、(i)単語センスの曖昧さ解消、名前付きエンティティ認識、時間的表現の認識と正規化、および意味的ロールラベル化を伴う文書前処理、(ii)文書クラスタリングを介した付随的なイベント抽出とコアレファレンスの解決、および(iii) KG構築と母集団が含まれる。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), систему, которая предоставляет новостные статьи в качестве исходных данных, строит график знаний (KOI-KG) случайных событий. Затем KOI-KG может быть использована для эффективного ответа на такие вопросы, как «Сколько инцидентов с убийством произошло в 2017 году с участием Шона?« Необходимые этапы построения KG включают: (i) предварительную обработку документов, включающую в себя дезагрегирование смысла слова, распознавание именованных сущностей, распознавание и нормализацию временных выражений и маркировку семантических ролей; (ii) извлечение случайных событий и разрешение ядра посредством кластеризации документов; и (iii) построение и популяцию KG.', 'zh': '吾言KOI(事知),此一供新闻文为输统,偶然构图谱(KOI-KG)。 然后KOI-KG以"2017年多少及肖恩杀戮"之类。 构KG所须步驿:(i)文档预处理,涉词义消歧义,名实体识,时表识规范化及语义角色; (ii) 因文档聚类偶然取共征决之。 (三) 公斤筑室。', 'hi': 'हम KOI (घटनाओं का ज्ञान) प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक प्रणाली जो समाचार लेखों को इनपुट के रूप में देती है, आकस्मिक घटनाओं का एक ज्ञान ग्राफ (केओआई-केजी) बनाती है। KOI-KG का उपयोग तब कुशलतापूर्वक सवालों के जवाब देने के लिए किया जा सकता है जैसे "2017 में कितनी हत्या की घटनाएं हुईं जिसमें शॉन शामिल थे? केजी के निर्माण में आवश्यक चरणों में शामिल हैं: (i) शब्द भावना बहुविकल्पी, नामित-इकाई मान्यता, अस्थायी अभिव्यक्ति मान्यता और सामान्यीकरण, और शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग को शामिल करने वाले दस्तावेज़ प्रीप्रोसेसिंग; (ii) दस्तावेज क्लस्टरिंग के माध्यम से आकस्मिक घटना निष्कर्षण और सह-सम्मेलन संकल्प; और (iii) केजी निर्माण और जनसंख्या।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair KOI (Eolas ar Theagmhais), córas a thug ailt nuachta mar ionchur, a thógann graf eolais (KOI-KG) ar imeachtaí teagmhasacha. Is féidir KOI-KG a úsáid ansin chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt go héifeachtach mar “Cé mhéad eachtra maraithe a tharla in 2017 a bhain le Seán?” Áirítear ar na céimeanna riachtanacha chun an KG a thógáil: (i) réamhphróiseáil doiciméad lena n-áirítear dí-athbhrí ar chiall na bhfocal, aithint eintiteas ainmnithe, aithint agus normalú ama cainte, agus lipéadú róil shéimeantach; (ii) asbhaint teagmhas teagmhasach agus réiteach croí-chomhdhála trí dhoiciméid a bhraisliú; agus (iii) KG tógáil agus daonra.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ KOI (მოვლენების ცნობიერება), სისტემა, რომელიც ახალგაზრულების შესახებ იგივე მოვლენების შესახებ, იქნება ინტერესტალური მოვლენების ცნობიერი გრაფიკას (KOI- KG). KOI- KG შემდეგ შეიძლება გამოიყენება ეფექტიურად გაუკეთებელი კითხვების შესახებ როგორც "რამდენი სიკვდილის ინტერესტი მოხდა 2017 წელში, რომელიც შონის შე KG- ის შექმნაში მოჭირდებული მონაცემები უნდა შექმნა: i) დოკუმენტის წინაპროცესება სიტყვის განსხვავება, სახელ ინტერტიკური განსხვავება, ტემპალური გამოსახულება და ნორმალიზაცია და სე (ii) დოკუმენტის კლასტერების გამოყენებით ინტერექტიური მოვლენების ექსტრექცია და შესაძლებელი რექსიოცია; და iii) KG-ის შექმნა და მოსახლეობა.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα που δίνει άρθρα ειδήσεων ως εισαγωγή, δημιουργεί ένα γράφημα γνώσης (ΚΟΙ-KG) τυχαίων γεγονότων. Η KOI-KG μπορεί στη συνέχεια να χρησιμοποιηθεί για να απαντήσει αποτελεσματικά σε ερωτήσεις όπως "Πόσα περιστατικά δολοφονίας συνέβησαν το 2017 που εμπλέκουν τον Σον;" Τα απαιτούμενα βήματα για την οικοδόμηση του KG περιλαμβάνουν: (i) προεπεξεργασία εγγράφων που περιλαμβάνει αποσαφήνιση λέξεων, αναγνώριση ονομασίας οντότητας, αναγνώριση χρονικής έκφρασης και ομαλοποίηση, και σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων. (ii) εξαγωγή τυχαίων συμβάντων και επίλυση συναπόφασης μέσω ομαδοποίησης εγγράφων· και iii) κατασκευή και πληθυσμός KG.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a KOI-t (Az események ismerete), egy olyan rendszert, amely a hírek bemutatásaként adott cikkeket, és egy tudásgrafát (KOI-KG) épít a véletlen eseményekről. A KOI-KG ezután hatékonyan válaszolhat olyan kérdésekre, mint például "Hány gyilkossági incidens történt 2017-ben, amelyek Sean-t érintették?" A KG építéséhez szükséges lépések közé tartozik: (i) a szóérzék egyértelműsítését magában foglaló dokumentumok előfeldolgozása, a nevezett entitás felismerése, az időbeli kifejezések felismerése és normalizálása, valamint a szemantikai szerepkörcímkézés; ii. véletlenszerű események kivonása és korreferencia feloldása dokumentumfürtözéssel; és iii. KG építése és lakossága.', 'kk': 'Біз KOI (Оқиғаларды білеміз), жаңалық мақалаларды келтірілген жүйе, оқиғалардың білім графика (KOI- KG) құрады. Содан кейін KOI- KG "2017 жылы Sean және қанша өлтіру жағдайды?" деген сұрақтардың жауап беру үшін қолданылады. KG құрылғандағы керек қадамдар: i) сөздердің сезімін өзгерту, аталған нысандарды анықтау, уақытша өрнектерді анықтау және нормализациялау және семантикалық рольді белгілеу үшін құжатты алдын- ала өткіз (ii) құжат кластерингі арқылы оқиғаларды тарқату және қасиеттердің айырымдылығы; қасиеттер және iii) КГ құрылымы мен адамдары.', 'it': 'Presentiamo KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), un sistema che ha dato gli articoli di notizie come input, costruisce un grafico della conoscenza (KOI-KG) degli eventi incidentali. KOI-KG può quindi essere utilizzato per rispondere efficacemente a domande come "Quanti incidenti di uccisione sono avvenuti nel 2017 che coinvolgono Sean?" I passaggi richiesti nella costruzione del KG includono: (i) preelaborazione dei documenti che coinvolgono la disambiguazione del senso delle parole, il riconoscimento delle entità nominate, il riconoscimento e la normalizzazione delle espressioni temporali e l\'etichettatura semantica dei ruoli; ii) estrazione di eventi incidentali e risoluzione della coreferenza tramite cluster di documenti; e iii) KG costruzione e popolazione.', 'mk': 'Ние го претставуваме KOI (знаење за инциденти), систем кој дава вести како влог, изградува граф на знаење (KOI-KG) за инцидентни настани. Кои-КГ може потоа да се користи за ефикасно одговори на прашања како што е „Колку убиствени инциденти се случија во 2017 година кои го вклучуваат Шон?“ Потребните чекори во изградбата на КГ вклучуваат: i) препроцесот на документите во кој се вклучува раздвоумување на зборовите, препознавање на именуваниот ентитет, препознавање на временски израз и нормализација, и означување на семантичната улога; (ii) инцидентно извлекување на настани и резолуција на соодветноста преку групирање на документи; и (iii) градење и население на КГ.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome KOI (Pažymėjimas apie incidentus), sistemą, pagal kurią naujienų straipsniai yra įvedami, kuria žinių grafiką (KOI-KG) apie atsitiktinius įvykius. Tada KOI-KG gali būti naudojama veiksmingai atsakyti į tokius klausimus kaip "Kiek žudymo incidentų įvyko 2017 m., susijusių su Seanu?" Reikalaujami KG kūrimo etapai apima: i) dokumentų i šankstinį apdorojimą, apimantį žodžio supratimo nedviprasmiškumą, vardinio subjekto pripažinimą, laiko išraiškos pripažinimą ir normalizavimą, ir semantinio vaidmens ženklinimą; (ii) incidental event extraction and coreference resolution via document clustering;  ir iii) KG statyba ir gyventojai.', 'ms': "Kami perkenalkan KOI (Pengetahuan Kejadian), sistem yang memberikan artikel berita sebagai input, membina graf pengetahuan (KOI-KG) peristiwa insiden. KOI-KG can then be used to efficiently answer questions such 'How many killing incidents happened in 2017 that involve Sean?'  The required steps in building the KG include: (i) document preprocessing involving word sense disambiguation, named-entity recognition, temporal expression recognition and normalization, and semantic role labeling;  (ii) pengekstrakan peristiwa insiden dan resolusi koreferensi melalui kumpulan dokumen; dan (iii) pembinaan KG dan populasi.", 'ml': "We present KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), a system that given news articles as input, builds a knowledge graph (KOI-KG) of incidental events.  KOI-KG can then be used to efficiently answer questions such 'How many killing incidents happened in 2017 that involve Sean?'  കെജി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള പടികള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു: (i) വാക്കുകളുടെ മനസ്സില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രേഖയിലുള്ള പ്രെസിക്രെസ് (ii) സംഭവിക്കുന്ന സംഭവത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതും കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ രീതി (ഐ) കെജി നിര്\u200dമ്മാണം ചെയ്യുന്നതും ജനസംഖ്യതയും.", 'mn': 'Бид зохиолын мэдлэг, мэдээллийн баримтууд бий болгосон системийг KOI-KG-ийн мэдлэг график бий болгодог. Ингээд KOI-KG-г 2017 онд Шон холбоотой хэдэн өлсгөл явдал болсон бэ? KG-г бүтээх шаардлагатай алхам нь: i) үгний мэдрэмжийн алдагдал, нэрлэгдсэн нэгж таних, хугацааны илэрхийлэл таних, нормализах, мөн semantic role labeling гэх баримтуудын алдагдал болох юм. (ii) бичил баримт хамтдаа тохиромжтой үйл явдал гаргах болон тайвны шийдвэрлэлт; харин iii) КГ бүтээл, хүн амын хүн ам.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), sistema li tagħti artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet bħala input, tibni grafika tal-għarfien (KOI-KG) ta’ avvenimenti inċidentali. Il-KOI-KG imbagħad tista\' tintuża biex twieġeb b\'mod effiċjenti mistoqsijiet bħal "Kemm seħħew in ċidenti ta\' qtil fl-2017 li jinvolvu Sean?" Il-passi meħtieġa fil-bini tal-KG jinkludu: (i) ipproċessar minn qabel tad-dokument li jinvolvi diżambigwazzjoni tas-sens tal-kelma, rikonoxximent tal-entità msejħa, rikonoxximent u normalizzazzjoni tal-espressjoni temporali, u tikkettar tar-rwol semantiku; (ii) l-estrazzjoni inċidentali ta’ avvenimenti u r-riżoluzzjoni ta’ koreferenza permezz ta’ raggruppament ta’ dokumenti; u (iii) kostruzzjoni u popolazzjoni ta’ KG.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer KOI (kjenning av hendingar), eit system som gjev nyhetsarklar som inndata, bygger eit kjenningsgraf (KOI- KG) av hendingar. @ title: window Dette nødvendige stegane i bygging av KG inkluderer: i) dokumentførrehandsaming som involverer disambiguasjon av ordfølelse, gjenkjenning av namn på einingar, gjenkjenning av tidlegare uttrykk og normalisering, og semantisk rolletiketting. ii) utpakking av hendingar og oppløysing av koreferanse ved hjelp av dokumentklassering; og iii) KG-konstruksjon og befolkning.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), system, który podawał artykuły wiadomościowe jako wejście, buduje wykres wiedzy (KOI-KG) zdarzeń przypadkowych. KOI-KG może być następnie wykorzystany do skutecznej odpowiedzi na pytania takie jak "Ile incydentów zabójstw miało miejsce w latach 2017, w których dotyczy Sean?". Wymagane kroki w budowie KG obejmują: (i) wstępne przetwarzanie dokumentów obejmujące rozpoznawanie sensu słowa, rozpoznawanie nazwanych jednostek, rozpoznawanie i normalizację wyrażeń czasowych oraz semantyczne oznaczanie roli; (ii) ekstrakcja zdarzeń przypadkowych i rozwiązywanie współreferencji poprzez klastrowanie dokumentów; oraz iii) budownictwo i populacja KG.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), un sistem care a dat articole de știri ca input, construiește un grafic de cunoștințe (KOI-KG) al evenimentelor incidentale. KOI-KG poate fi folosit apoi pentru a răspunde eficient la întrebări precum "Câte incidente de ucidere s-au întâmplat în 2017 care îl implică pe Sean?" Pașii necesari în construirea KG includ: (i) prelucrarea documentelor care implică dezambiguizarea sensului cuvântului, recunoașterea entităților denumite, recunoașterea și normalizarea expresiei temporale și etichetarea rolurilor semantice; (ii) extragerea evenimentelor accidentale și rezolvarea corefenței prin gruparea de documente; și (iii) KG construcție și populație.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo KOI (znanje incidenata), sistem koji je dao novinske članke kao ulaz, izgradi grafik znanja (KOI-KG) incidentalnih događaja. KOI-KG se onda može iskoristiti da se efikasno odgovori na pitanja takvih "Koliko se dogodilo incidenta ubijanja 2017. koji uključuju Seana?" Potrebni koraci u izgradnji KG uključuju: i) preobradivanje dokumenta uključujući disambiguaciju smisla riječi, priznanje imena entiteta, prepoznavanje temporalnog izraza i normalizaciju, i etiketiranje semantičkih uloga; ii) izvlačenje incidentalnih događaja i rezolucija pristojnosti putem skusteringa dokumenta; i i iii) KG građevina i populacija.', 'so': "Waxaan soo wadaynaa KOI (Aqoonta dhacdooyinka), nidaam warqadaha warqada u qoran sida input, wuxuu dhisaa xarunta aqoonta (KOI-KG) oo dhacdooyinka dhacdooyinka ah. Markaas KOI-KG waxaa loo isticmaali karaa in aad ugu jawaabto su'aalo faa'iido ah, kuwaas oo ah 'Intee dhacdooyinka dilidda ee 2017 ee ku saabsan Sean?'? Xadhigyada loo baahan yahay dhisidda KG waa: (ii) Soo saarista dhacdooyinka iyo go’aanka kaar ah oo ku qoran heshiiska wargeyska; iyo dhismaha KG iyo dad.", 'si': "අපි KOI (අවස්ථාවන්ගේ දන්නවන්), වාර්තාව පිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපි KOI- KG පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නවට උත්තර දෙන්න පුළුවන් '2017 වලින් ශෝන් වෙනුවෙන් මැරීම් අවස්ථාවක් කීයක් සිද්ධ Name (i) සිද්ධ වෙන්න සිද්ධ සිද්ධ සිද්ධ සිද්ධ විශේෂණය සහ සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය විශේෂණය ක ඒ වගේම (Ii) KG නිර්මාණය සහ ජාතිය.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), ett system som gav nyhetsartiklar som input, bygger en kunskapsgraf (KOI-KG) över oförutsedda händelser. KOI-KG kan sedan användas för att effektivt svara på frågor som "Hur många mordincidenter hände 2017 som involverar Sean?" De nödvändiga stegen för att bygga KG inkluderar: (i) förbehandling av dokument som involverar ordförnimmelse, namngiven entitet igenkänning, tidsmässig uttryck igenkänning och normalisering, och semantisk rollmärkning; ii) extraktion av oavsiktliga händelser och coreference-lösning via dokumentklustring. och iii) KG konstruktion och befolkning.', 'ur': 'ہم نے KOI (حادثوں کے علم) کو پیش کیا ہے، ایک سیستم جس نے اخبار لاکھوں کو اینپیٹ بنایا ہے، ایک علم گراف (KOI-KG) حادثہ حادثہ کے لئے بنایا ہے۔ پھر KOI-KG اس طرح سؤال کے جواب کے لئے استعمال کئے جاسکتے ہیں کہ "2017 میں کتنی قتل حادثہ اتفاق ہوئی ہے جو شان کے ساتھ ہے؟" KG بنانے کی ضرورت والی قدم شامل ہوتی ہے: (i) لکھنے کے منظور غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر (ii) حادثہ حادثہ اٹھانے والی حادثہ اور رضامندی رضامندی کے ذریعہ سند کلسٹر کے ذریعہ۔ اور (iii) KG بنانا اور جماعت۔', 'ta': "நாம் KOI (நிகழ்வுகளின் அறிவு, செய்தி கட்டுரைகளை உள்ளீட்டாக கொடுக்கும் ஒரு அமைப்பு, நிகழ்வுகளின் அறிவு வரைபடம் (KOI- KG) கட்டுகிறது. பின்னர் KOI-KG கேள்விகளுக்கு விடையை பயன்படுத்த முடியும் '2017-ல் எத்தனை கொலை நிகழ்வுகள் நடந்தது' என்று கேள்விகள் செய KG கட்டுவதில் தேவையான படிகள் சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: (i) சொல்லும் பொருள் குறிப்பிடுதல், பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் குறிப்பிடுதல், தற்காலிக க கூற்று கு (ii) நிகழ்வு வெளியேறுதல் மற்றும் குறிப்பு தெளிவுத்திறன் ஆவண கூட்டுதல் வழியாக; (iii) கேஜி கட்டமைப்பு மற்றும் மக்கள்.", 'uz': 'Biz hodisa KOI (Hodisalar haqida maʼlumot), yangi xabarlarni input deb belgilangan tizim, hodisa hodisalar haqida maʼlumot grafikni (KOI-KG) yaratadi. Keyin KOI-KG shunday savollarni "2017-yilda qancha murakkab sodir bo\'lgan odamlarni ishlatish mumkin? KG\'ni yaratish uchun kerakli qadamlar include: (i) ҳужжат имкониятларини тафаккур қилиш, номи entity qiymatini aniqlash, vaqt ifodalarni аниқлаш ва normalisiyatsiz, va semantik role lab chiqarish mumkin; (ii) Ҳужжат майдони ёруғлаш билан мавжуд ҳодиса чиқариш ва нуқсон ҳалқичилики; (iii) KG yaratish va raqamli.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu KOI (tri thức của các sự cố), một hệ thống đã đưa các bài báo như là nhập vào, xây dựng một đồ thị kiến thức (KOI-KG) về các sự kiện phụ kiện. Cách sử dụng KOI-KG để trả lời một cách hiệu quả câu hỏi như là "Bao nhiêu vụ giết người xảy ra tại Bă-Chừng mà Sean liên quan?" Các bước cần thiết trong việc xây dựng KG bao gồm: i) xử lý sẵn tài liệu có mâu thuẫn từ giác, nhận dạng với cái tên, nhận dạng biểu thức tạm thời và bình thường, và nhãn nghĩa chữ nghĩa. Sự kiện ngẫu nhiên và giải quyết khả năng bằng việc đóng gói tài liệu. và III, cấu trúc và dân số KG.', 'nl': "We presenteren KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), een systeem dat nieuwsberichten als input geeft, een kennisgrafiek (KOI-KG) van incidentele gebeurtenissen bouwt. KOI-KG kan dan efficiënt worden ingezet om vragen als 'Hoeveel moordincidenten zijn er in 2017 gebeurd waarbij Sean betrokken is?' De vereiste stappen bij het bouwen van de KG omvatten: (i) documentvoorverwerking met betrekking tot woordbetekenis, naamloze entiteitsherkenning, temporele expressie herkenning en normalisatie, en semantische rollabeling; ii) extractie van incidentele gebeurtenissen en oplossing van coreferenties via documentclustering; en iii) KG bouw en bevolking.", 'de': 'Wir stellen KOI (Knowledge of Incidents) vor, ein System, das Nachrichtenartikel als Input bereitstellt, einen Wissensgraphen (KOI-KG) von zufälligen Ereignissen erstellt. KOI-KG kann dann genutzt werden, um Fragen wie "Wie viele Mordfälle geschahen im 2017, bei denen Sean involviert war?" effizient zu beantworten. Die erforderlichen Schritte beim Aufbau der KG umfassen: (i) Dokumentenvorbereitung mit Wortsinn-Disambiguation, Named-Entity-Erkennung, zeitliche Ausdruckserkennung und -Normalisierung sowie semantische Rollenbeschriftung; ii) Extraktion von zufälligen Ereignissen und Lösung von Coreferenz durch Dokumentenclustering; und iii) KG Bau und Bevölkerung.', 'bg': 'Представяме система, която дава новинарски статии като вход, изгражда графика на знанието (КОИ-КГ) на случайни събития. След това КОИ-КГ може да бъде използвана, за да отговори ефективно на въпроси като "Колко инциденти с убийства са се случили през 2017 г., които включват Шон?" Необходимите стъпки в изграждането на КГ включват: (и) предварителна обработка на документи, включваща разграничаване на смисъла на думата, разпознаване на наименовани субекти, разпознаване и нормализиране на времеви изрази и етикетиране на семантични роли; Извличане на случайни събития и разрешаване на съвместни референции чрез групиране на документи; и iii) KG строителство и население.', 'da': "Vi præsenterer KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), et system, der gav nyhedsartikler som input, bygger en vidensgraf (KOI-KG) over tilfældige begivenheder. KOI-KG kan derefter bruges til effektivt at besvare spørgsmål som 'Hvor mange drabshændelser skete i 2017, der involverer Sean?' De nødvendige skridt i opbygningen af KG omfatter: (i) forbehandling af dokumenter, der involverer ordsans adskillelse, navngivet-entitet anerkendelse, tidsmæssig udtryksgenkendelse og normalisering, og semantisk rollemærkning; ii) udvinding af tilfældige hændelser og coreferenceopløsning via dokumentklyngning og iii) KG opførelse og befolkning.", 'hr': "Predstavljamo KOI (znanje događaja), sistem koji daje novinske članke kao ulaz, izgradi grafik znanja (KOI-KG) incidentnih događaja. KOI-KG se onda može koristiti za učinkovito odgovoriti na pitanja kao što je 'Koliko se dogodilo incidenta ubojstva 2017. koji uključuju Seana?' Potrebni koraci u izgradnji KG uključuju: i) preobradivanje dokumenta uključujući disambiguaciju smisla riječi, priznanje imena entiteta, priznanje temporalnog izraza i normalizaciju te označavanje semantičke uloge; (ii) izvlačenje slučajnih događaja i rješenje liječenja putem skupljanja dokumenta; i i iii) građevina i populacija KG.", 'id': "Kami memperkenalkan KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), sistem yang memberikan artikel berita sebagai input, membangun grafik pengetahuan (KOI-KG) dari kejadian insiden. KOI-KG kemudian dapat digunakan untuk menjawab secara efisien pertanyaan seperti 'Berapa banyak insiden pembunuhan yang terjadi pada 2017 yang melibatkan Sean?' The required steps in building the KG include: (i) document preprocessing involving word sense disambiguation, named-entity recognition, temporal expression recognition and normalization, and semantic role labeling;  (ii) ekstraksi peristiwa insidental dan resolusi koreferensi melalui kumpulan dokumen; dan (iii) konstruksi KG dan populasi.", 'ko': '우리는 KOI(사건지식)를 제기했는데 이것은 뉴스 문장을 입력하는 시스템으로 우발적인 사건의 지식도(KOI-KG)를 구축했다.그리고 KOI-KG는 "2017년에 션과 관련된 살인사건이 몇 건 발생했느냐"고 효과적으로 답할 수 있다.KG를 구축하는 데 필요한 절차는 다음과 같다. (i) 단어의 의미 변조, 명명 실체 식별, 시제 표현식 식별과 규범화, 의미 역할 표기와 관련된 문서의 사전 처리.(ii) 문서 분류를 통해 우연한 이벤트 추출과 공지 소해를 진행한다.그리고 (iii) KG 건축과 인구.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha KOI (Ujuzi wa Matukio), mfumo ambao ulitoa makala za habari kama input, unajenga picha ya maarifa (KOI-KG) ya matukio yanayotokea. KOI-KG anaweza kutumika ili kujibu maswali yenye ufanisi kama “matukio mengi ya mauaji yalitokea mwaka 2017 ambayo yanahusisha Sean?” The required steps in building the KG include: (i) document preprocessing involving word sense disambiguation, named-entity recognition, temporal expression recognition and normalization, and semantic role labeling;  (ii) Uteuzi wa tukio hilo na suluhisho la msingi kwa kupitia viungo vya nyaraka; na ujenzi na idadi ya KG.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim KOI, një sistem që i jep artikujt e lajmeve si input, ndërton një grafik të njohurive (KOI-KG) të ngjarjeve incidentale. KOI-KG mund të përdoret pastaj për t\'u përgjigjur me efektshmëri pyetjeve të tilla "Sa incidente vrasjesh ndodhën në 2017 që përfshijnë Sean?" Hapat e kërkuara në ndërtimin e KG përfshijnë: (i) përprocesimin e dokumentit që përfshin çambiguacionin e kuptimit të fjalës, njohjen e njësisë së quajtur, njohjen e shprehjes së përkohshme dhe normalizimin dhe etiketën semantike të rolit; (ii) nxjerrjen e ngjarjeve incidentale dhe zgjidhjen e korreferencës nëpërmjet grupimit të dokumenteve; dhe iii) ndërtimin dhe popullsinë e KG.', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ዜና ጽሑፎች እንደሚያሳየው የKOI (የነቅሶች እውቀት) ስርዓት፣ የሁኔታ ጉዳዮች እውቀትን መዝገብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የKOI-KG ጥያቄዎችን በጥያቄ ለመቀበል ይችላል ‹ምን ያህል የሞት ጉዳይ በ2017 ውስጥ በሲን ውስጥ ሆኖአል›› በKG መሠረት የሚፈልገው እርምጃዎች:(i) የቃላትን አስተያየት ማሰናከል፣ የአካላት ማውቀት፣ በጊዜው የክፍለ መልዕክት ማወቅ እና ትምህርት እና አስተዳዳደር እና የsemantic role መጠቀም በመጠቀም ነው፡ (ii) የሰነድ ጉዳይ ውጤት እና የጉዳዩ ውጤት በሰነድ ማውጣት; (iii) KG መሠረት እና ቁጥር', 'fa': 'ما KOI (شناسایی حادثه\u200cها) را نشان می\u200cدهیم، یک سیستم که مقاله\u200cهای خبری را به عنوان ورودی داده است، یک گراف دانش (KOI-KG) از حادثه\u200cهای حادثه می\u200cسازد. پس KOI-KG می\u200cتواند برای پاسخ موثرتی به سوال\u200cهایی که در سال ۲۰۱۷ اتفاق قتل افتاد، استفاده شود؟ مرحله\u200cهای لازم برای ساختن KG شامل: i) پیش\u200cپردازش سند شامل تغییر فعالیت احساس کلمه، شناسایی عنوان اسم، شناسایی واژه\u200cهای موقتی و نمایش\u200cسازی و نقشه\u200cهای semantic; و (ii) اخراج اتفاقات اتفاق افتاده و حل\u200cسازی از طریق گروه\u200cسازی سند; و و (iii) ساختار و جمعیت KG.', 'tr': "Biz KOI'yi, täzelikler girdi ýaly hatlar berilen sistemi, olaryň bilim grafisini inşa edýäris. Sonra KOI-KG 2017-nji ýylda Sean bilen mejbur bolan näçe öldürme meselelere täsirli jogap bermek üçin ulanyp biler? KG binanynda gerekli adımlar i çerilýär: (i) söz duýgularyny bozmakdan öňden işleýär, ady-taýýarlama, geçici ifade tanamak we normalization we semantik nämeler etiketlemesi; (ii) Gadym çykmak we seçmeler desktaplamak vasitynda görkez; iii) KG inşaat we ilat sany.", 'bn': "We present KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), a system that given news articles as input, builds a knowledge graph (KOI-KG) of incidental events.  তারপর কোআই-কেজি কার্যকর প্রশ্নের উত্তরে ব্যবহার করা যাবে '২০১৭ সালে কতটা হত্যা ঘটনা ঘটেছে যা সিনের সাথে জড়িত? কে. জি. বানানোর প্রয়োজনীয় পদক্ষেপ অন্তর্ভুক্ত: (i) শব্দের মানসিক প্রক্রিয়া বিভ্রান্ত, নাম-বস্তুর স্বীকৃতি, সাময়কালীন প্রকাশের স্ (ii) incidental event extraction and coreference resolution via document clustering;  এবং কেজি নির্মাণ এবং জনসংখ্যা।", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo KOI (znanje nesreća), sistem koji daje novinske članke kao ulaz, izgradi grafik znanja (KOI-KG) incidentnih događaja. KOI-KG se onda može iskoristiti da se efikasno odgovori na pitanja poput "Koliko se dogodilo incidenta ubijanja 2017. koji uključuju Seana?" Potrebni koraci u izgradnji KG uključuju: i) preobradivanje dokumenta uključujući disambiguaciju smisla riječi, priznanje imena entiteta, priznanje temporalnog izraza i normalizaciju te označavanje semantičke uloge; ii) izvlačenje incidentalnih događaja i rješenje pristojnosti putem skusteringa dokumenta; i i iii) građevina i populacija KG.', 'af': "Ons stel KOI (kennis van inkidente), ' n stelsel wat nuus artikels as invoer gegee het, bou 'n kennis graf (KOI- KG) van inkidentale gebeurtenis. KOI- KG kan dan gebruik word na effektief antwoord vrae sodat 'Hoeveel doodslag incidente gebeur in 2017 wat Sean insluit? ' Die benodige stappe in die bou van die Kg insluit: i) dokument voorprosessering wat invoer woord sins ontwikkeling, genoem- entiteit herken, tydelike uitdrukking herken en normalisering, en semantiese roletiketing; (ii) incidental event extraction and coreference resolution via document clustering; en en (iii) KG-konstruksie en bevolking.", 'az': "Biz KOI'yi, x…ôb…ôr m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ daxil etdiyimiz sistemi, olaraq olaraq g…ôl…ônl…ôrin bilgi grafńĪnńĪ (KOI-KG) inŇüa edir. Sonra KOI-KG, Sean'u inkar ed…ôn ne√ß…ô √∂l√ľm olaraq 2017-ci ild…ô n…ô q…ôd…ôr oldu? KG in ŇüaatńĪnda ehtiyacńĪ olan adńĪmlar: i) s√∂z duygusunu inkiŇüaf etm…ôk, adlńĪ t…ôŇükil tanńĪmasńĪ, vaxtlńĪ ifad…ô tanńĪmasńĪ v…ô normalizasyon v…ô semantik rol etiketi i √ß…ôrisind…ô t…ôŇükil edilm…ôsi olar. (ii) v…ôziyy…ôt √ß…ôkm…ôsi v…ô m…ôrh…ôm…ôt √ß…ôkm…ôsi s…ôhif…ôl…ôri s…ôhif…ôl…ôri il…ô t…ôkrarlama vasit…ôsil…ô; KG inŇüaat v…ô n√ľfusu.", 'cs': 'Představujeme KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), systém, který jako vstup poskytuje zpravodajské články, sestavuje znalostní graf (KOI-KG) incidentů. KOI-KG pak může být použita k efektivnímu zodpovězení otázek jako "Kolik incidentů zabíjení se stalo v průběhu 2017, které se týkaly Seana?" Požadované kroky při budování KG zahrnují: (i) předzpracování dokumentů zahrnující rozšiřování slovního smyslu, rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit, rozpoznávání a normalizaci časového výrazu a značení sémantických rolí; ii) extrakce náhodných událostí a řešení společných referencí prostřednictvím shlukování dokumentů; a iii) KG výstavba a obyvatelstvo.', 'ca': 'Presentam KOI, un sistema que proporciona articles de notícies com entrada, construeix un gràfic de coneixement (KOI-KG) d\'eventos incidentals. KOI-KG es pot utilitzar per respondre eficientment preguntes com "Quants incidents de mort van passar al 2017 que impliquen Sean?" Les etapes requerides per construir el KG inclouen: i) la preprocessió de documents que impliquen desambiguació del sentit de paraula, reconeixement de noms-entitats, reconeixement temporal d\'expressions i normalització, i etiquetar el paper semàntic; ii) l\'extracció incidental d\'events i la resolució de referència a través de la agrupació de documents; i iii) construcció i població de KG.', 'et': 'Esitleme KOI (Knowledge of Incidents), süsteemi, mis annab uudisartikleid sisendina, ehitab teadmisgraafiku (KOI-KG) juhuslikest sündmustest. KOI-KG saab seejärel tõhusalt vastata sellistele küsimustele nagu "Mitu surmajuhtumit 2017. aastal juhtus, mis puudutavad Seani?" KG ehitamisel vajalikud sammud hõlmavad: (i) dokumendi eeltöötlust, mis hõlmab sõnatähenduse eristamist, nimelise olemi tuvastamist, ajalise avaldise tuvastamist ja normaliseerimist ning semantilist rolli märgistamist; ii) juhuslike sündmuste väljavõtmine ja kaasviidete lahendamine dokumentide klastrite kaudu; ja iii) KG ehitus ja rahvastik.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք KOI-ը, մի համակարգ, որը լրատվական հոդվածներ է տալիս որպես ներմուծք, ստեղծում է գիտելիքի գրաֆիկ (KOI-KG) պատահական իրադարձությունների մասին: Այնուհետև KOI-KG-ը կարող է արդյունավետ պատասխանել այնպիսի հարցերին, ինչպիսիք են. "Ինչքա՞ն սպանության դեպքեր տեղի ունեցան 2017 թվականին, որոնք ներառում են Շոնին": The required steps in building the KG include: (i) document preprocessing involving word sense disambiguation, named-entity recognition, temporal expression recognition and normalization, and semantic role labeling;  (ii) incidental event extraction and coreference resolution via document clustering;  and (iii) KG construction and population.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme KOI (Knowledge of Incidents) -järjestelmän, joka antaa uutisartikkeleita syötteenä, rakentaa tietokaavion (KOI-KG) satunnaisista tapahtumista. KOI-KG:n avulla voidaan vastata tehokkaasti kysymyksiin, kuten "Kuinka monta surmaa tapahtui vuonna 2017, joissa Sean oli mukana?" Tarvittavat vaiheet KG:n rakentamisessa ovat: (i) dokumenttien esikäsittely, johon sisältyy sanaaistin erottelu, nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistus, aikailmaisujen tunnistus ja normalisointi sekä semanttinen roolimerkintä; ii) satunnaisten tapahtumien talteenotto ja yhteisvertailun ratkaiseminen asiakirjaklusteroinnin avulla; ja iii) KG rakentaminen ja väestö.', 'jv': "Kita menehi koI (Bilih kapan ingkang), sistem sing nyimpen barang kanggo nyebutaké informasi, nggawe barang nggawe diagram (KoI-KG) kanggo barang seneng perkaran anyari. KoI-KG iso ngejaraké mruput kanggo ngomong nik akeh pisan ning acara 'Pilih perbudhakan kanggo rerampak perbudhakan neng 1997 sing isin mo Seson ?' Kowe kudu nggawe KG kudu mulai: i) dokumen sing ngendalikno mbigué awak dhéwé, nambah-atik dhéwé, kutwisan pangan-atik dhéwé, ngono alam-atik dhéwé, lan etiket sematik penting; (ii) Kemerdekaan kang caffes akèh dumaten karo corefection lan iii) KG nggawe lan populer.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam KOI (Znanje o incidentih), sistem, ki daje novice kot vhod, gradi graf znanja (KOI-KG) naključnih dogodkov. KOI-KG se lahko nato uporablja za učinkovito odgovarjanje na vprašanja, kot so "Koliko umorov se je zgodilo v letu 2017, ki vključujejo Seana?" Zahtevani koraki pri gradnji KG vključujejo: (i) predobdelavo dokumentov, ki vključuje razločitev besednega pomena, prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet, prepoznavanje in normalizacijo časovnih izrazov ter semantično označevanje vlog; (ii) pridobivanje naključnih dogodkov in reševanje korreference prek združevanja dokumentov; in (iii) KG gradbeništvo in prebivalstvo.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da KOI (Sani'ar Incoms), wani na'urar da aka sanar da makala da aka shiga, yana samar da wani masani (KOI-KG) na cikin abubuwa. KOI-KG kan a yi amfani da su wajen su tambayi masu yiwuwa kamar 'Nayawa masu kashe sun shige a 2017 abin da ya shiga Sean?'? Jigon da ake amfani da wajen yin samar da KG include: (i) takardar aiki mai amfani da bambanci da magana masu cikin sunana-abun, sunan-abun, ganin magana mai lokaci da kuma masu daidaita, da sunan aikin mai fasa; (ii) incidental event extraction and coreference resolution via document clustering;  samun KG da mutane.", 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་KOI(Knowledge of Incidents)ཡི་སྒྲ་བརྙན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་གསར་འགུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་བྱུང་བ་ཅིག་གསར་གཏོང་། KOI-KG དེ་ནས་དེ་གནད་དོན་ནས་དབུལ་གྱིས་ལན་གསལ་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་ལ་ལན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། '2017་ལ་འབར་ཤུགས་པའི་དོན་ The required steps in building the KG include: (i) document preprocessing involving word sense disambiguation, named-entity recognition, temporal expression recognition and normalization, and semantic role labeling;  (ii) གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་གཙང་བཙུགས་པ་དང་གནད་དོན་གྱིས་ཡིག་ཆའི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ཐོག་ཏུ། (iii) KG ལས་འཛམ་གླིང་དང་མི་འབོར་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བརྩིས་ཤིག་རེད།", 'he': 'אנו מציגים KOI (ידע של Incidents), מערכת שנתן מאמרים חדשות כתוצאה, בונה גרף ידע (KOI-KG) של אירועים מקרים. אז KOI-KG יכול להשתמש כדי לענות בצורה יעילה על שאלות כמו "כמה תקריות רצח קרו ב-2017 שמעסקים שון?" הצעדים הנדרשים בבניין הק.ג.י כוללים: i) התהליכת המסמכים המתכללת ניתוח חוש מילים, זיהוי ישות בשם, זיהוי ביטוי זמני ונורמליזציה, ותיקיון תפקידים סמנטיים; (ii) חולץ אירועים מקריים ופתרון התאמה באמצעות קבוצת מסמכים; ולiii) בניית קיג\'י ואוכלוסיה.'}
{'en': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text', 'ar': 'NEUROSENT-PDI في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: الاستفادة من نموذج المشاعر متعدد المجالات لاستنتاج القطبية في نص المدونة الصغيرة', 'pt': 'NEUROSENT-PDI na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Aproveitando um modelo de sentimento de vários domínios para inferir a polaridade no texto do microblog', 'fr': "NEUROSENT-PDI au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Tirer parti d'un modèle de sentiment multi-domaines pour inférer la polarité dans le texte d'un micro-blog", 'es': 'NEUROSENT-PDI en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Aprovechamiento de un modelo de sentimiento multidominio para inferir la polaridad en el texto de microblogs', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のNEUROSENT - PDIタスク1 ：マイクロブログテキストの極性を推論するためのマルチドメインセンチメントモデルの活用', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务1上NEUROSENT-PDI:因多域情以推微博文本之极性', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर NEUROSENT-PDI: माइक्रो-ब्लॉग टेक्स्ट में ध्रुवीयता का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक बहु-डोमेन भावना मॉडल का लाभ उठाना', 'ru': 'NEUROSENT-PDI на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Использование многодоменной модели настроений для вывода полярности в тексте микроблога', 'ga': 'NEUROSENT-PDI ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Samhail Mothúcháin Ilfhearainn a Ghiaráil chun Tátal a bhaint as Polaracht i dTéacs Micreabhlag', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Αξιοποίηση ενός μοντέλου συναισθημάτων πολλαπλών τομέων για την εξαγωγή πολικότητας σε κείμενο μικροιστολογίου', 'ka': 'NEUROSENT', 'hu': 'NEUROSENT-PDI a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Többtartományos érzelmi modell hasznosítása a polaritás átalakítására mikroblog szövegben', 'mk': 'NEUROSENT-PDI на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Разголемување на мултидомен модел на чувство за внатрешна поларитет во текстот на микроблогот', 'it': 'NEUROSENT-PDI a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Sfruttare un modello di sentimento multi-dominio per inferire la polarità nel micro-blog Text', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1- ല്\u200d നെയ്രോസെന്\u200dറ്- പിഡിഐ: മൈക്രോ- ബ്ലോഗ് ലെക്സ്റ്റില്\u200d പോളാരിറ്റിയില്\u200d പോളരിറ്റിയില്\u200d പോളിറ്റിയ', 'kk': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text', 'lt': 'NEUROSENT-PDI puslapyje 2018 m. 1 užduotis: sukurti daugiadominio jautrumo modelį, skirtą užkrečiamajai poliarijai mikroblogo tekste', 'ms': 'NEUROSENT-PDI pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Menangkap Model Sentimen Berbanyak-Domain untuk Polariti Melangkah dalam Teks Mikroblog', 'pl': 'NEUROSENT-PDI na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Wykorzystanie modelu sentymentów wielododomenowych do analizy polaryzacji w mikroblogu Tekst', 'ro': 'NEUROSENT-PDI la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Utilizarea unui model de sentiment multi-domeniu pentru infectarea polarității în micro-blog Text', 'sr': 'NEUROSENT-PDI na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Uživanje multidomenalnog sentimentnog modela za infringaciju polarnosti u tekstu mikro-blog a', 'mt': 'NEUROSENT-PDI f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Nibnu Mudell ta’ Sentiment Multi-Domeniku għall-Polarità Inferranti fit-Test tal-Mikroblog', 'mn': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text', 'si': 'NEUROSNT-PDI at semeval-2018 Job 1: Leverging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Pollity in micro-blog Text', 'no': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro blog Text', 'ta': 'செம்வால்- 2018 பணியில் NEUROSENT- PDI: மைக்ரோ- blog உரையில் போலாரிட்டியை புகுத்துவதற்கான பல- Domain Sentiment Model', 'sv': 'NEUROSENT-PDI på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Utnyttja en känslomodell för flera domäner för att minska polariteten i mikrobloggtext', 'so': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text', 'ur': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tiếp tục tìm kiếm ở SemEvl-208 Task 1: Sự xúc phạm một mô hình cảm xúc đa miền cho sự tượng ảnh thông tin trong văn bản vi-blog', 'nl': 'NEUROSENT-PDI op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Een Multi-Domain Sentiment Model inzetten voor het afleiden van polariteit in micro-blog Tekst', 'da': 'NEUROSENT-PDI på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Udnyttelse af en Multi-Domain Sentiment Model til at forringe polaritet i mikroblogtekst', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Използване на многодомейнен модел на сентименти за намаляване на полярността в текста на микроблога', 'hr': 'NEUROSENT-PDI na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: podizanje višedomene sentimentnog modela za pogoršanje polarnosti u mikro-blogu tekstu', 'de': 'NEUROSENT-PDI auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Nutzung eines Multi-Domain Sentiment Modells zur Ableitung der Polarität in Micro-Blog Text', 'id': 'NEUROSENT-PDI di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Menyerangkan Model Sentimen Multi-Domain untuk Polaritas Penyerangan dalam Teks Micro blog', 'ko': 'SemEval-18의 NEUROSENT-PDI 퀘스트 1: 다역 정서 모델을 이용하여 마이크로 블로그 텍스트의 극성을 추정한다', 'fa': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text', 'sw': 'Mpango wa SemEval-2018', 'af': "NEUROSENT-PDI by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: Leveraging 'n Multi-Domein Sentiment Model vir Inferring Polarisie in Micro-blog Teks", 'tr': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text', 'sq': 'NEUROSENT-PDI në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text', 'am': 'ስራ 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog text', 'hy': 'ՆԵՈւՌՕՍENT-PDI-ը, 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի առաջին հանձնարարությունը. Միկրոբլոգի տեքստում բազմաբևեռ զգացմունքների մոդելի վերաբերյալ', 'az': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১-এ নেইউরোসেন্ট-পিডিআই: মাইক্রো- ব্লগের লেক্সটেক্সটে বহুডোমেন্ট সেন্টিমেন্ট মডেল প্রবাহিত করার জন্য একটি ম', 'bs': 'NEUROSENT-PDI na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Podizanje multidomena sentimentnog modela za infringaciju polarnosti u mikro-blogu tekstu', 'ca': 'NEUROSENT-PDI a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro blog Text', 'cs': 'Úkol 1: Využití multidoménového sentimentového modelu pro odvození polarity v mikroblogu Text', 'et': 'NEUROSENT-PDI SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Mitme domeeni sentimendi mudeli kasutamine polaarsuse vähendamiseks mikroblogis Tekst', 'fi': 'NEUROSENT-PDI SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Monitoimialueen tuntemusmallin hyödyntäminen polariteetin vähentämiseksi mikroblogissa Teksti', 'jv': 'NOURL OWN-PNI at semiinval-2020 task 1: Lewerging a Multi-domain Sentiment model for Informating polarity in mikro-website Text', 'sk': 'NEUROSENT-PDI na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Izkoriščanje večdomenskega modela sentimenta za zmanjšanje polarnosti v mikroblogu Besedilo', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacter', 'he': 'NEUROSENT-PDI ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: להעלות מודל תחושה Multi-Domain עבור פולאריות נכנסת בטקסט מיקרובלוג', 'bo': 'NEUROSENT-PDI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Leveraging a Multi-Domain Sentiment Model for Inferring Polarity in Micro-blog Text'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the NeuroSent system that participated in SemEval 2018 Task 1. Our system takes a supervised approach that builds on neural networks and word embeddings. Word embeddings were built by starting from a repository of user generated reviews. Thus, they are specific for sentiment analysis tasks. Then, tweets are converted in the corresponding vector representation and given as input to the neural network with the aim of learning the different semantics contained in each emotion taken into account by the SemEval task. The output layer has been adapted based on the characteristics of each subtask. Preliminary results obtained on the provided training set are encouraging for pursuing the investigation into this direction.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام NeuroSent الذي شارك في SemEval 2018 المهمة الأولى. يتبع نظامنا نهجًا خاضعًا للإشراف يعتمد على الشبكات العصبية وحفلات الكلمات. تم إنشاء عمليات دمج الكلمات من خلال البدء من مستودع المراجعات التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة المستخدم. وبالتالي ، فهي محددة لمهام تحليل المشاعر. بعد ذلك ، يتم تحويل التغريدات في تمثيل المتجه المقابل وإعطاؤها كمدخلات للشبكة العصبية بهدف تعلم الدلالات المختلفة الموجودة في كل عاطفة والتي يتم أخذها في الاعتبار بواسطة مهمة SemEval. تم تكييف طبقة الإخراج بناءً على خصائص كل مهمة فرعية. النتائج الأولية التي تم الحصول عليها على مجموعة التدريب المقدمة مشجعة لمتابعة التحقيق في هذا الاتجاه.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système NeuroSent qui a participé à la tâche 1 du SemEval 2018. Notre système adopte une approche supervisée qui repose sur des réseaux de neurones et des intégrations de mots. Les intégrations Word ont été créées à partir d'un référentiel d'avis générés par les utilisateurs. Ils sont donc spécifiques aux tâches d'analyse des sentiments. Ensuite, les tweets sont convertis dans la représentation vectorielle correspondante et transmis en entrée au réseau de neurones dans le but d'apprendre les différentes sémantiques contenues dans chaque émotion prise en compte par la tâche SemEval. La couche de sortie a été adaptée en fonction des caractéristiques de chaque sous-tâche. Les résultats préliminaires obtenus sur l'ensemble de formation fourni sont encourageants pour poursuivre l'enquête dans cette direction.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema NeuroSent que participó en la Tarea 1 de SemEval 2018. Nuestro sistema adopta un enfoque supervisado que se basa en redes neuronales e incrustaciones de palabras. Las incrustaciones de palabras se crearon partiendo de un repositorio de reseñas generadas por los usuarios. Por lo tanto, son específicos para las tareas de análisis de sentimientos. Luego, los tweets se convierten en la representación vectorial correspondiente y se dan como entrada a la red neuronal con el objetivo de aprender las diferentes semánticas contenidas en cada emoción que se tienen en cuenta en la tarea SemEval. La capa de salida se ha adaptado en función de las características de cada subtarea. Los resultados preliminares obtenidos en el conjunto de capacitación proporcionado son alentadores para continuar la investigación en esta dirección.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema NeuroSent que participou da Tarefa 1 do SemEval 2018. Nosso sistema adota uma abordagem supervisionada que se baseia em redes neurais e embeddings de palavras. As incorporações do Word foram criadas a partir de um repositório de avaliações geradas pelo usuário. Assim, eles são específicos para tarefas de análise de sentimentos. Em seguida, os tweets são convertidos na representação vetorial correspondente e dados como entrada para a rede neural com o objetivo de aprender as diferentes semânticas contidas em cada emoção levada em consideração pela tarefa SemEval. A camada de saída foi adaptada com base nas características de cada subtarefa. Os resultados preliminares obtidos no conjunto de treinamento fornecido são encorajadores para prosseguir a investigação nessa direção.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2018 Task 1に参加したNeuroSentシステムについて述べる。私たちのシステムは、ニューラルネットワークとワード埋め込みに基づいた監視されたアプローチを採用しています。Word埋め込みは、ユーザーが生成したレビューのリポジトリから開始して構築されました。したがって、感情分析タスクに特化しています。次に、ツイートは対応するベクトル表現で変換され、SemEvalタスクによって考慮される各感情に含まれる異なる意味論を学習することを目的として、ニューラルネットワークへの入力として与えられます。出力層は、各サブタスクの特性に基づいて適合されている。提供されたトレーニングセットで得られた予備的な結果は、この方向への調査を進めるために奨励されている。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर न्यूरोसेंट सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जिसने SemEval 2018 टास्क 1 में भाग लिया था। हमारा सिस्टम एक पर्यवेक्षित दृष्टिकोण लेता है जो तंत्रिका नेटवर्क और शब्द एम्बेडिंग पर बनाता है। Word embeddings उपयोगकर्ता जनरेट की गई समीक्षाओं के भंडार से प्रारंभ करके बनाए गए थे. इस प्रकार, वे भावना विश्लेषण कार्यों के लिए विशिष्ट हैं। फिर, tweets को संबंधित वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व में परिवर्तित किया जाता है और SemEval कार्य द्वारा ध्यान में रखे गए प्रत्येक भावना में निहित विभिन्न शब्दार्थों को सीखने के उद्देश्य से तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के इनपुट के रूप में दिया जाता है। आउटपुट परत को प्रत्येक उपकार्य की विशेषताओं के आधार पर अनुकूलित किया गया है। प्रदान किए गए प्रशिक्षण सेट पर प्राप्त प्रारंभिक परिणाम इस दिशा में जांच को आगे बढ़ाने के लिए उत्साहजनक हैं।', 'zh': '本文述参SemEval 2018 Task 1NeuroSent统。 我们的系统用基于神经网络和词嵌入的监督法。 词嵌自用户生论存储库始构。 是以特定情析事也。 然后推文以应矢量转换,以为神经网络输,所以学SemEval思虑者,情之异语义。 输出已随子职调。 所供培训集上得初令人鼓舞,助朝勘。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система NeuroSent, которая участвовала в задаче 1 SemEval 2018. Наша система использует контролируемый подход, основанный на нейронных сетях и вложениях слов. Встраивания слов были построены, начиная с репозитория пользовательских отзывов. Таким образом, они специфичны для задач анализа настроений. Затем твиты преобразуются в соответствующее векторное представление и выдаются в качестве входных данных в нейронную сеть с целью изучения различной семантики, содержащейся в каждой эмоции, учитываемой задачей SemEval. Выходной слой был адаптирован на основе характеристик каждой подзадачи. Предварительные результаты, полученные по предоставленному набору учебных материалов, обнадеживают для продолжения расследования в этом направлении.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras NeuroSent a ghlac páirt i dTasc 1 SemEval 2018. Glacann ár gcóras cur chuige maoirsithe a thógann ar líonraí neural agus leabaithe focal. Tógadh leabú focal trí thosú ó stór léirmheasanna arna gineadh ag úsáideoirí. Mar sin, baineann siad go sonrach le tascanna anailíse meon. Ansin, déantar tweets a thiontú san ionadaíocht veicteoireach comhfhreagrach agus a thugtar mar ionchur don líonra néarúil d'fhonn na séimeantaice éagsúla atá i ngach mothúchán a fhoghlaim a chuirtear san áireamh sa tasc SemEval. Tá an ciseal aschuir curtha in oiriúint bunaithe ar shaintréithe gach fothasc. Is ábhar misnigh iad na réamhthorthaí a fuarthas ar an bhfoireann oiliúna a cuireadh ar fáil chun an t-imscrúdú ar an treo seo a leanúint.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που συμμετείχε στην εργασία 1. Το σύστημά μας ακολουθεί μια εποπτική προσέγγιση που βασίζεται σε νευρωνικά δίκτυα και ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Οι ενσωματώσεις λέξεων κατασκευάστηκαν ξεκινώντας από ένα αποθετήριο κριτικών που δημιουργούνται από τους χρήστες. Έτσι, είναι ειδικά για εργασίες ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων. Στη συνέχεια, τα tweets μετατρέπονται στην αντίστοιχη διανυσματική αναπαράσταση και δίνονται ως εισαγωγή στο νευρωνικό δίκτυο με στόχο την εκμάθηση της διαφορετικής σημασιολογίας που περιέχεται σε κάθε συναίσθημα που λαμβάνεται υπόψη από την εργασία SemEval. Το στρώμα εξόδου έχει προσαρμοστεί με βάση τα χαρακτηριστικά κάθε δευτερεύουσας εργασίας. Τα προκαταρκτικά αποτελέσματα που επιτεύχθηκαν στο παρεχόμενο εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο είναι ενθαρρυντικά για την συνέχιση της έρευνας προς αυτή την κατεύθυνση.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერს ნეირო გაგზავნილი სისტემა, რომელიც semiEval 2018 დავაშვება 1-ში. ჩვენი სისტემა გავაკეთება სურათებული პროგრამა, რომელიც ნეიროლური ქსელებით და სიტყვების შემდეგ შექმნა. მომხმარებლის შექმნილი რეფოსტორიდან დაწყებული სიტყვების შექმნა. ასე რომ, ისინი განსაკუთრებულია სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის დავალებისთვის. შემდეგ, ტივიტები შეიცვალობიან შესაბამისი ვაკტორის გამოსახულებაში და იყოს, როგორც ნეიროლური ქსელის შესაბამისი მიზემი, რომ სწავლობა განსხვავებული სიმენტიკები, რომლებიც ყოველ ემოციაში გამოყენება საქაღალდე აეპორტირებულია ყოველ საქაღალდე საქაღალდე. ოპვეგთენთრვ პვჱსლრამთ, ოჲლსფთრთ ნა ოპვეგთევნთწ რპვნთნდ ნაპვე, ჟვ ოჲმჲდნაგარ ჱა ოპჲეყლზვნთვ ნა პაჱჟლვეგანვრჲ გ რჲჱთ ჟპვე.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a NeuroSent rendszert, amely részt vett a SemEval 2018 feladatban 1. Rendszerünk felügyelt megközelítést alkalmaz, amely neurális hálózatokra és szóbeágyazásokra épül. A Word beágyazásokat a felhasználók által generált értékelések tárolójából készítették. Így ezek specifikusak az érzelmek elemzésére. Ezután a tweeteket átalakítják a megfelelő vektoros ábrázolásban, és bemenetként adják az ideghálózatnak, azzal a céllal, hogy megismerjék az egyes érzelmek különböző szemantikáját, amelyeket a SemEval feladat figyelembe vesz. A kimeneti réteget az egyes részfeladatok jellemzői alapján igazítottuk. A rendelkezésre álló képzési készlet előzetes eredményei ösztönzőek az ebben az irányban folytatott vizsgálat folytatásához.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema NeuroSent che ha partecipato al Task 1 SemEval 2018. Il nostro sistema adotta un approccio supervisionato che si basa su reti neurali e embedding di parole. Le incorporazioni di Word sono state create partendo da un repository di recensioni generate dagli utenti. Pertanto, sono specifici per le attività di analisi sentimentale. Successivamente, i tweet vengono convertiti nella corrispondente rappresentazione vettoriale e dati come input alla rete neurale con l'obiettivo di apprendere le diverse semantiche contenute in ogni emozione prese in considerazione dal compito SemEval. Lo strato di uscita è stato adattato in base alle caratteristiche di ogni sottoattività. I risultati preliminari ottenuti sul set di formazione fornito sono incoraggianti per proseguire l'indagine in questa direzione.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың бірінші тапсырмасында қатысу үшін жіберілген NeuroSent жүйесін анықтайды. Біздің жүйеміз невралдық желілерде және сөздерді ендіру үшін бақылау тәртібін қолданады. Сөздерді ендіру пайдаланушының репозиториясынан бастап құрылды. Сонымен, олар сезімдік анализ тапсырмалары үшін ерекше. Содан кейін, tweets сәйкесті вектордың түрінде аударылып, SemEval тапсырмасынан есептелген әрбір эмоциялардың түрлі семантикаларды оқыту мақсатымен невралдық желіне енгізіледі. Шығыс қабатты әрбір суреттің қасиеттерінің негізінде адаптер етілді. Келтірілген оқыту бағдарламасында алдындағы алдындағы нәтижелер осы бағытта іздеу үшін көмектеседі.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот NeuroSent кој учествуваше во SemEval 2018 задача 1. Нашиот систем прифаќа надгледуван пристап кој се базира на нервни мрежи и зборови вградени. Вклучувањата на зборови беа изградени со почеток од складиште на рецензии генерирани од корисникот. Така, тие се специфични за задачите за анализа на чувствата. Потоа, твитовите се конвертирани во соодветната репрезентација на векторите и се дадени како влог во нервната мрежа со цел да се научат различните семантики кои се содржат во секоја емоција земена во предвид од задачата SemEval. Излезниот слој е адаптиран врз основа на карактеристиките на секоја подпрашање. Прелиминарните резултати добиени во врска со обезбедената обука се охрабрувачки за продолжување на истрагата во оваа насока.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1 യില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന ന്യൂറോസെന്റ് സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200d നെറ്ററുകളിലും വാക്കുകളിലും നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നിരീക Name അതുകൊണ്ട്, അവയൊക്കെ പ്രത്യേക ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാനുള്ള ജോലികള്\u200dക്കാണ്. പിന്നെ വെക്റ്ററിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d മാറ്റുകയും സെമ്എവാല്\u200d ജോലിയാല്\u200d എണ്ണിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഓരോ വികാരത്തിലുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള ഓരോ സബ്ജുവിന്റെ വിചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഉടുപ്പുട്ട് layer മാറ്റിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കൊടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രെയിനിസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d ലഭിച്ച ആദ്യ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ നേരിലേക്ക് അന്വേഷണം നടത്തുന്നതി', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2018 оны SemEval Task 1-д оролцсон NeuroSent системийг тайлбарладаг. Бидний систем мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд, үг нэвтрүүлэлт дээр байгуулагддаг удирдлагатай арга хэрэгтэй. Word embedding was built by starting from a repository of user generated reviews. Тэд мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээний ажил дээр тодорхой. Тэгээд tweets нь хоорондоо харьцуулсан вектор илэрхийлэлд өөрчлөгдсөн бөгөөд SemEval ажлын хувьд авсан сэтгэл хөдлөлд байгаа өөр төрлийн семантикийг сурах зорилго болгон мэдрэмжтэй байдаг. Шинэ гаргалт давхар нь суурь асуултын чадваруудын тулд зохицуулагдсан. Эхлээд өгсөн сургалтын багш дээр гарсан анхны үр дүн нь энэ хэсэгт шалгалтыг дагаж байгаа юм.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma NeuroSent sistema, kuri dalyvavo 2018 m. SemEval 1 užduotyje. Mūsų sistema taiko prižiūrėtą požiūrį, kuris grindžiamas nerviniais tinklais ir žodžių įtraukimu. žodžių įdėjimai buvo sukurti pradedant iš naudotojų sukauptų peržiūrų saugyklos. Taigi jos yra specialios jautrumo analizės užduotims atlikti. Tuomet tweetai konvertuojami atitinkamame vektoriaus vaizde ir pateikiami kaip įėjimas į nervų tinklą, siekiant išmokti skirtingą semantiką kiekvienoje emocijoje, į kurią atsižvelgiama atliekant SemEval užduotį. Išėjimo sluoksnis pritaikytas atsižvelgiant į kiekvieno paklausos charakteristikas. Išankstiniai mokymo rinkinio rezultatai skatina tęsti tyrimą šia kryptimi.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem NeuroSent yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval 2018 Task 1. Sistem kita mengambil pendekatan yang diawasi yang membina pada rangkaian saraf dan penyambungan perkataan. Name Jadi, mereka spesifik untuk tugas analisis perasaan. Kemudian, tweet diubah dalam perwakilan vektor yang sepadan dan diberikan sebagai input ke rangkaian saraf dengan tujuan untuk mempelajari semantik yang berbeza yang ada dalam setiap emosi yang dianggap oleh tugas SemEval. Lapisan output telah disesuaikan berdasarkan ciri-ciri setiap subtanya. Preliminary results obtained on the provided training set are encouraging for pursuing the investigation into this direction.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema NeuroSent li pparteċipat f’SemEval 2018 Task 1. Is-sistema tagħna tieħu approċċ sorveljat li jibni fuq netwerks newrali u inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem. L-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem inbnew billi bdew minn repożitorju ta’ reviżjonijiet iġġenerati mill-utent. Għalhekk, huma speċifiċi għal kompiti ta’ analiżi tas-sentimenti. Imbagħad, it-tweets jiġu kkonvertiti fir-rappreżentazzjoni korrispondenti tal-vettur u mogħtija bħala input għan-netwerk newrali bil-għan li titgħallem is-semantika differenti li tinsab f’kull emozzjoni meqjusa mill-kompitu SemEval. The output layer has been adapted based on the characteristics of each subtask.  Ir-riżultati preliminari miksuba fuq is-sett ta’ taħriġ ipprovdut huma inkoraġġanti biex titwettaq l-investigazzjoni f’din id-direzzjoni.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver NeuroSent- systemet som delta i halvEval 2018- oppgåve 1. Systemet vårt tar ein oversikt tilnærming som bygger på neiralnettverk og ordinnbygging. Tekstinnbygging vart bygd ved å starta frå ein lager av brukarar laga gjennomsikt. Dei er derfor spesifikke for sentimentanalyseoppgåver. Så blir tweeter konverterte i den tilsvarande vektorrepresentasjonen og gitt som inndata til neuralnettverket med målet å lære forskjellige semantikkar som inneheld i kvar emosjon som blir brukt i konto av semiEval-oppgåva. Utdatalaget er tilpassa basert på eigenskapane for kvar underspørjing. Dette første resultatet som er fått på den oppgjevne opplæringsinnstillingane påvirkar å følgja undersøkinga i denne retninga.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano system NeuroSent, który uczestniczył w SemEval 2018 Task 1. Nasz system przyjmuje podejście nadzorowane, które opiera się na sieciach neuronowych i osadzeniach słów. Embeddings Word zostały zbudowane przez rozpoczęcie od repozytorium generowanych przez użytkowników recenzji. Są one więc specyficzne dla zadań analizy sentymentów. Następnie tweety są przekształcane w odpowiednią reprezentację wektorową i podawane jako wejście do sieci neuronowej w celu poznania różnych semantyk zawartych w każdej emocji uwzględnianych przez zadanie SemEval. Warstwa wyjściowa została dostosowana w oparciu o charakterystykę każdego podzadania. Wstępne wyniki uzyskane na dostarczonym zestawie szkoleniowym są zachęcające do prowadzenia dochodzenia w tym kierunku.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul NeuroSent care a participat la SemEval 2018 Task 1. Sistemul nostru are o abordare supravegheată care se bazează pe rețele neurale și încorporări de cuvinte. Încorporările Word au fost construite pornind de la un depozit de recenzii generate de utilizatori. Astfel, ele sunt specifice sarcinilor de analiză a sentimentelor. Apoi, tweeturile sunt convertite în reprezentarea vectorială corespunzătoare și date ca intrare în rețeaua neurală cu scopul de a învăța diferitele semantice conținute în fiecare emoție luată în considerare de sarcina SemEval. Stratul de ieșire a fost adaptat în funcție de caracteristicile fiecărei subactivități. Rezultatele preliminare obținute pe setul de formare furnizat sunt încurajatoare pentru continuarea investigației în această direcție.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje NeuroSent sistem koji je sudjelovao u poluvremenom zadatku 2018. godine. Naš sistem uzima nadzorni pristup koji se izgradi na neuralnim mrežama i uključuju riječi. Počevši od repozitorija korisnika proizvedenih pregleda su izgrađene uključenim rečima. Dakle, oni su specifični za zadatak analize sentimenta. Onda se tweets pretvaraju u odgovarajuću predstavu vektora i dati kao ulaz u neuralnu mrežu sa ciljem učenja različitih semantika u svakoj emociji koje se uzima u obzir posao SemEval. Izlazni sloj je prilagođen na osnovu karakteristika svakog podpitanja. Preliminarni rezultati dobiveni na određenom setu obuke ohrabruju istragu u ovom pravcu.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver NeuroSent-systemet som deltog i SemEval 2018 Task 1. Vårt system har ett övervakat tillvägagångssätt som bygger på neurala nätverk och ordinbäddningar. Word-inbäddningar byggdes genom att utgå från ett arkiv med användargenererade recensioner. Därför är de specifika för känsloanalysuppgifter. Därefter omvandlas tweets i motsvarande vektorrepresentation och ges som input till det neurala nätverket i syfte att lära sig de olika semantiken i varje känsla som beaktas av SemEval-uppgiften. Utgångslagret har anpassats utifrån egenskaperna hos varje delaktivitet. Preliminära resultat som erhållits på den erbjudna utbildningsuppsättningen är uppmuntrande för att fortsätta utredningen i denna riktning.', 'ta': 'SemEval 2018 பணியில் பங்கிடப்பட்ட NeuroSent அமைப்பை இந்த தாள் விளக்குகிறது. எங்கள் அமைப்பு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மற்றும் வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் ஒரு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட முறையை எடுத்துக்  Name அதனால், அவர்கள் உணர்வு ஆய்வு செயல்களுக்கு குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளது. பின்னர், தொடர்பு நெறியின் பகுதியில் இருந்து தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் உள்ளீட்டாக கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது புதிய வலைப்பின்னலில் உள்ளும்,  ஒவ்வொரு துணை பணியின் தன்மையை அடிப்படையில் வெளியீட்டு அடுக்கு மாற்றப்பட்டுள்ளது. வழங்கப்பட்ட பயிற்சி அமைப்பில் கிடைக்கப்பட்ட முன்னிருப்பு விளைவுகள் இந்த திசையில் விசாரணையை தேடு', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්නේ න්\u200dයුරෝස් පැත්ත පද්ධතිය, සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩ 1 වලට සම්බන්ධ වුනා. අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරධානයක් අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරනවා ඒක න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය සහ වචන සංවිධානයේ න භාවිතාකරුවෙන් නිර්මාණය කරපු පරීක්ෂණයක් නිර්මාණය කරපු භාවිතාකරණයෙන් පටන් ගත්ති ඉතින්, ඔවුන් විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණ වැඩකට විශේෂයි. ඊට පස්සේ, ට්විට්ස් වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයෙන් වෙනස් වෙන්නය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සෙම්විල් වැඩියාවෙන් හැම දැනගත්ත හැම දැනගත්ත හැම දැනග ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක හැම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවට සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා. ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දාලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මේ පැත්තට පරීක්ෂණය පස්සෙන් පස්ස', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka NeuroSent oo ka qayb galay shaqo 1 ee SemEval 2018. Systemkanagu wuxuu qaataa qaab ilaaliya oo ku dhista shabakada neurada iyo hadalka. Heshiiska warqada ah waxaa lagu dhisay marka laga bilaabo kursiga qofka isticmaalka ah oo ka soo bandhigay baaritaanka. Sidaas darteed waa kuwo gaar ah oo ay u yihiin shaqada kaleemeyska. Then, tweets are converted in the corresponding vector representation and given as input to the neural network with the aim of learning the different semantics contained in each emotion taken into account by the SemEval task.  Laylka soo baxa waxaa lagu beddelay takhasuska shabakad walba. Arrimaha hore ee heerka waxbarashada la siiyo waxaa lagu dhiirrigelinayaa in baaritaanka lagu sameeyo halkan.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ نوروسٹ سیسٹم کی توصیف کرتا ہے جو سیم Eval 2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں شامل ہوتا ہے. ہماری سیستم نے ایک نظارت کی طریقہ لیا ہے جو نیورال نیٹورک اور کلمات انڈینگ پر بناتا ہے۔ Name اس طرح، یہ احساس تحلیل کے کاموں کے لئے مخصوص ہیں. اس کے بعد، ٹیوٹ کو متعارف ویکتور نمایش میں تبدیل کیا جاتا ہے اور نیورال نیٹ ورک کے اندر وارد کیا جاتا ہے جس کے مطابق ہر احساسات میں مختلف سیمانٹیکوں کی تعلیم کا موقع ہے جو SemEval کار کے ذریعہ اپنا حساب لیا جاتا ہے. The output layer has been adapted based on the characteristics of each subtask. پیشوائی نتیجے اس طرح کی تحقیق کی پیروی کرنے کے لئے آرزو کررہے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval 2018 Vazifa 1 ishga murojaat qiladigan NeuroSent tizimini anglatadi. Bizning tizimmiz neyron tarmoqlari va so'zlar ichida ishlab chiqarishni boshlaydi. Name Va shunday qilib, ular sentiment analyzerlari vazifalari uchun mahsus. Keyin, Twitterlar qisqa vector taqdimotida almashtiriladi va tarmoqga kiritiladi va SemEval vazifani hisoblangan har bir xil hisobdagi har xil semantika o'rganish uchun. @ info: whatsthis Koʻrsatilgan taʼminlovchi soʻzlarda birinchi natijalar bu tizimga qidirishni amalga oshadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống Neuro Sent đã tham gia nhiệm vụ SemEvol 1. Hệ thống của chúng tôi có một phương pháp được giám sát xây dựng trên mạng thần kinh và sự tác nhân từ. Từ tổ chức từ đã được xây dựng bằng cách bắt đầu từ một kho lưu trữ các bản duyệt đã tạo ra người dùng. Chúng đặc trưng cho các nhiệm vụ phân tích cảm xúc. Sau đó, tweet được chuyển đổi theo đại diện vector và được đưa vào hệ thần kinh với mục đích học ngữ pháp khác nhau trong mỗi cảm xúc được tính to án bởi nhiệm vụ SemEvol. Các lớp xuất đã được thích nghi dựa trên tính cách của mỗi mặt phụ đề. Kết quả sơ bộ thu được trên tập đoàn đào tạo đã khuyến khích việc tiến hành điều tra theo hướng này.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje NeuroSent sustav koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 1. polovice 2018. Naš sustav uzima nadzorni pristup koji se izgradi na neuronskim mrežama i uključuju riječi. Uključenje riječi izgrađeno je početkom iz skladišta korisnika proizvedenih pregleda. Dakle, oni su specifični za zadatke analize osjećaja. Tada se tweets preobraćaju u odgovarajućem predstavljanju vektora i dati kao ulaz u neuralnu mrežu s ciljem učiti različite semantike sadržane u svakoj emociji uzimajući u obzir zadatak SemEval. Izlazni sloj je prilagođen na temelju karakteristika svakog podpitanja. Preliminarni rezultati dobiveni na određenom setu obuke ohrabruju istragu u ovom smjeru.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver NeuroSent systemet, der deltog i SemEval 2018 Opgave 1. Vores system tager en overvåget tilgang, der bygger på neurale netværk og ordindlejringer. Word-indlejringer blev bygget ved at starte fra et lager af brugergenererede anmeldelser. Således er de specifikke for sentimentalanalyseopgaver. Derefter konverteres tweets i den tilsvarende vektorrepræsentation og gives som input til det neurale netværk med det formål at lære den forskellige semantik indeholdt i hver følelse taget i betragtning af SemEval opgaven. Outputlaget er blevet tilpasset baseret på karakteristika for hver underopgave. De foreløbige resultater, der er opnået i forbindelse med uddannelsessættet, er opmuntrende til at fortsætte undersøgelsen i denne retning.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва системата която участва в задача 1. Нашата система приема надзорен подход, който се основава на невронни мрежи и вграждане на думи. Вградените думи са създадени, като се започне от хранилище на потребителски прегледи. По този начин те са специфични за задачите за анализ на сентимента. След това туитовете се преобразуват в съответното векторно представяне и се дават като вход в невронната мрежа с цел изучаване на различните семантики, съдържащи се във всяка емоция, взета предвид при задачата СемЕвал. Изходният слой е адаптиран въз основа на характеристиките на всяка подзадача. Предварителните резултати, получени по предоставения набор от обучения, са окуражаващи за продължаване на разследването в тази посока.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het NeuroSent systeem dat deelnam aan SemEval 2018 Task 1. Ons systeem hanteert een begeleide aanpak die voortbouwt op neurale netwerken en woord embeddings. Word embeddings werden gebouwd door te starten vanuit een repository met door gebruikers gegenereerde reviews. Ze zijn dus specifiek voor sentimentanalyse taken. Vervolgens worden tweets omgezet in de overeenkomstige vectorrepresentatie en als input aan het neurale netwerk gegeven met als doel de verschillende semantiek in elke emotie te leren, rekening houdend met de SemEval-taak. De outputlaag is aangepast op basis van de kenmerken van elke subtaak. De voorlopige resultaten van de aangeboden trainingsset zijn bemoedigend om het onderzoek in deze richting voort te zetten.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das NeuroSent-System, das an SemEval 2018 Task 1 teilgenommen hat. Unser System verfolgt einen überwachten Ansatz, der auf neuronalen Netzen und Worteinbettungen aufbaut. Word-Einbettungen wurden erstellt, indem sie von einem Repository mit benutzergenerierten Bewertungen ausgehen. Somit sind sie spezifisch für Aufgaben der Stimmungsanalyse. Anschließend werden Tweets in die entsprechende Vektordarstellung umgewandelt und als Input an das neuronale Netzwerk gegeben, um die verschiedenen Semantiken der jeweiligen Emotion zu erlernen, die bei der SemEval-Aufgabe berücksichtigt werden. Die Ausgabeschicht wurde an die Eigenschaften der einzelnen Teilaufgaben angepasst. Die vorläufigen Ergebnisse des bereitgestellten Trainingssets sind ermutigend, die Untersuchung in diese Richtung fortzusetzen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem NeuroSent yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval 2018 Task 1. Sistem kita mengambil pendekatan yang diawasi yang dibangun pada jaringan saraf dan pembangunan kata. Penampilan kata dibangun dengan memulai dari repositori resensi yang dibuat oleh pengguna. Jadi, mereka spesifik untuk tugas analisis perasaan. Kemudian, tweet dikonversi dalam representation vektor yang sama dan diberikan sebagai input ke jaringan saraf dengan tujuan mempelajari semantik yang berbeda yang terkandung dalam setiap emosi yang dipertimbangkan oleh tugas SemEval. Lapisan output telah diadaptasi berdasarkan karakteristik setiap subtask. Hasil awal yang diperoleh dalam set pelatihan yang diberikan adalah mendorong untuk melanjutkan penyelidikan ke arah ini.', 'ko': '본고는 SemEval 2018 퀘스트 1에 참가한 NeuroSent 시스템을 묘사한다.우리 시스템은 신경 네트워크와 단어를 기반으로 하는 감독 방법을 채택하고 있다.단어 삽입은 사용자가 생성한 평론 라이브러리에서 시작합니다.그래서 정서 분석 임무에 전문적으로 쓰인다.그런 다음 트윗을 적절한 벡터 표현으로 변환하고 SemEval 임무가 고려하는 각 정서에 포함된 다양한 의미를 학습하기 위해 신경 네트워크의 입력으로 활용한다.출력층은 이미 모든 하위 작업의 특성에 따라 조정되었다.제공된 교육집에서 얻은 초보적인 결과는 이 방향에 대한 조사에 도움이 된다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم عصبی فرستاده را توصیف می\u200cکند که در تابع ۱ نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ شرکت می\u200cکند. سیستم ما یک دستور تحت نظر قرار گرفت که روی شبکه های عصبی و کلمه\u200cهای داخلی ساخته می\u200cشود. وارد کردن کلمات با آغاز از یک ذخیره کاربر بررسی\u200cهای تولید شده ساخته شده است. بنابراین، آنها برای کارهای تحلیل احساسات خاص هستند. سپس، تویتها در نمایش ویکتور متفاوت تغییر داده می شوند و به عنوان ورودی به شبکه عصبی با هدف یاد گرفتن سیمانتیک متفاوتی که در هر احساسی که توسط وظیفه SemEval به حساب گرفته شده است به عنوان ورودی به شبکه عصبی است. لایه خروجی بر اساس ویژگی\u200cهای هر پایین\u200cپرسی adapted has been made based on the characteristics of each subtask. نتایج اولیه\u200cای که در مجموعه آموزش داده می\u200cشود برای دنبال تحقیقات در این مسیر تشویق می\u200cکنند.', 'sw': 'This paper describes the NeuroSent system that participated in SemEval 2018 Task 1.  Mfumo wetu unachukua hatua inayofuatiliwa inayojenga kwenye mitandao ya kisasa na maneno yanayoingia. Ujumbe wa maneno yalitengenezwa kwa kuanzia kutoka kwenye makala ya mtumiaji yaliyotengeneza maoni. Kwa hiyo, ni mahususi kwa kazi za uchambuzi wa hisia. Kisha, twita zinabadilishwa katika uwakilishi wa vector inayofanana na kutolewa kama input kwenye mtandao wa neura kwa lengo la kujifunza mijadala tofauti yaliyopo katika kila hisia zilizochukuliwa na kazi ya SemEval. Kiwango cha matokeo imebadilishwa kwa kutumia sifa za kila kazi. Matokeo ya awali yaliyopatikana kwenye kituo cha mafunzo kilichotolewa ni kuhamasisha kufuatilia uchunguzi katika mwelekeo huu.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die NeuroSent stelsel wat gedeel het in SemEval 2018 Opdrag 1. Ons stelsel neem 'n ondersoekte toegang wat op neurale netwerke en woord inbêding bou. Woord inbêring is gebou deur begin van 'n stoorplek van gebruiker genereerde hersiening. So is hulle spesifieke vir sentimentanaliseerde taak. Dan word tweets omgeskakel in die ooreenstemmende vektorvoorstelling en gegee as invoer na die neuralnetwerk met die doel van die onderwerp van die verskillende semantieke wat in elke emosie ingehou is in rekening deur die SemEval taak. Die uitset laag is aanpas gebaseer op die karakteristieke van elke subtvraag. Preliminare resultate wat op die verskaf onderwerp stel ontvang word, is bevestig om die onderwerp in hierdie rigting te volg.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 2018-nji Görev 1-nji Taýgynda goşulan NeuroSent sistemini tashylaýar. Biziň sistemamyz näyral şebekelerde we söz integralarda inşa eden gözleýän bir nusga alýar. Ullançylaryň gaýd etmek üçin söz gabdalyklary guralýar. Şonuň üçin duýgular analyzasynda takyk zadylar bar. Sonra, twitler uyumlu vektör temsilinde dönüştürüler ve SemEval görevi tarafından alan farklı semantikleri öğrenmek amacıyla nöral ağa girdi. Çikgi gatlaky her asty soraglaryň has karakterlerne daşart edildi. Berilen eğitim setinde alan öňki netijeler bu ýoly barlamaga täsirleýär.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin NeuroSent që mori pjesë në SemEval 2018 Task 1. Sistemi ynë merr një qasje të mbikqyrur që mbështetet në rrjetet neuronale dhe përfshirjen e fjalëve. Ndërtesat e fjalëve u ndërtuan duke filluar nga një repozitor i revizioneve të gjeneruara nga përdoruesit. Thus, they are specific for sentiment analysis tasks.  Pastaj, tweetet konvertohen në përfaqësimin e vektorit korrispondues dhe jepen si hyrje në rrjetin nervor me qëllim që të mësojnë semantikën e ndryshme të përmbajtur në çdo emocion të marrë parasysh nga detyra SemEval. Lajmi i daljes është përshtatur bazuar në karakteristikat e çdo nënpyetje. Rezultatet paraprake të fituara në grupin e trajnimit të siguruar janë inkurajuese për ndjekjen e hetimit në këtë drejtim.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ SemEval 2018 ስራ 1 ላይ የተካፈለውን የነuroSent system ን ይናገራል፡፡ ሲስተምረታችን በኔural network እና ቃልን በጥያቄ የሚሠራውን የጠበቀ ሥርዓት ይወስዳል፡፡ Name ስለዚህም ለስሜት ማስታወቂያው ሥራ የተለየ ናቸው፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ ትዊተሮችን በሴmEval ስራ የተደረገውን የተለየውን ልዩ ስምናንት ለማስተማር ይደረጋሉ፡፡ የደረጃ ምርጫዎች በተጠቃሚ የግንኙነት ማህበረሰብ ላይ የመጀመሪያው ፍሬዎች ወደዚህ መንገድ ምርመራን ለመፈለግ ያበረታሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է ՆեյրոՍենթ համակարգը, որը մասնակցել է 2018 թ. Սեմեվալ առաջին խնդիրը: Մեր համակարգը վերահսկված մոտեցում է, որը հիմնված է նյարդային ցանցերի և բառերի ներգրավման վրա: Բառերի ներգրավումները կառուցվել են սկսելով օգտագործողների ստեղծված վերլուծումների պահարանից: Այսպիսով, դրանք հատուկ են զգացմունքների վերլուծության խնդիրների համար: Այնուհետև, թվիթերը փոխակերպվում են համապատասխան վեկտորների ներկայացման մեջ և տրվում են որպես նյարդային ցանցի ներմուծք, որպեսզի սովորեն յուրաքանչյուր զգացմունքում գտնվող տարբեր սեմանտիկան, որը հաշվի առնում է ՍեմԷվալ խնդիրը: Արդյունքի շերտը հարմարվել է հիմնված յուրաքանչյուր ենթահարցի հատկությունների վրա: Առաջին արդյունքները, որոնք ստացվել են տրամադրված ուսուցման համակարգում, խրախուսում են հետազոտությունը այս ուղղությամբ շարունակելու համար:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval Task 1-də iştirak edən NeuroSent sistemini təsbiq edir. Sistemimiz nöral a ğları və sözlərin istifadəsində inşa edilən gözləmə tərzini alır. İstifadəçilərin yaratdığı nümunələrin depositindən başlamaq üçün söz inşalları inşa edildi. Beləliklə, onlar hisslərin analizi işləri üçün müəyyən edirlər. Sonra, tweets müəyyən vektör göstəricisinə dönüşür və SemEval işləri ilə hesabladıqları hər emosyonda olan müxtəlif semantik öyrənmək məqsədilə nöral ağına giriş olaraq verilir. Çıqış səviyyəsi hər altı sorğunun xüsusiyyətlərinə görə uyğunlaşdırıldı. Mərhəmətli təhsil quruğunda qazanmış ilk sonuçlar bu təhsil yoluna yönəlmək üçün təşkil edir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করা নিউরোসেন্ট সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করছে। আমাদের সিস্টেম নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক এবং শব্দ বিভিন্ন ভাষায় নির্মাণ করার একটি পর্যবেক্ষণের উপায় নেয়। Name তাই তারা আবেগ বিশ্লেষণের কাজের জন্য নির্দিষ্ট। তারপর টুইট সংশ্লিষ্ট ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্বে পরিবর্তন করা হয় এবং নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কে ইনপুট হিসেবে প্রদান করা হয়, যার উদ্দেশ্যে সেমভাল কাজের দ্বারা অনুভ প্রত্যেক সাবটাসের চরিত্রের ভিত্তিতে আউটপুট স্তর পরিবর্তন করা হয়েছে। প্রদান করা প্রশিক্ষণ সেটে প্রাথমিক ফলাফল এই দিকে তদন্ত অনুসরণ করার জন্য উৎসাহ প্রদান করছে।', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema NeuroSent que va participar en SemEval 2018 Task 1. El nostre sistema adopta un enfocament supervisat que es basa en xarxes neurals i integracions de paraules. Les integracions de paraules van ser construïdes començant d'un repositori de recenses generades per l'usuari. Thus, they are specific for sentiment analysis tasks.  Després, els tweets es converteixen en la representació vector correspondent i es donen com entrada a la xarxa neuronal amb el objectiu d'aprendre les diferents semàntiques contenues en cada emoció que la tasca SemEval tenia en compte. La capa de sortida s'ha adaptat basant-se en les característiques de cada subpregunta. Preliminary results obtained on the provided training set are encouraging for pursuing the investigation into this direction.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje NeuroSent sistem koji je sudjelovao u poluvremenom zadatku 2018. godine. Naš sistem uzima nadzorni pristup koji se izgradi na neuralnim mrežama i uključuju riječi. Uključenje riječi izgrađeno je početkom iz skladišta korisnika proizvedenih pregleda. Dakle, oni su specifični za zadatke analize sentimenta. Onda se tweets preobraćaju u odgovarajućem predstavljanju vektora i dati kao ulaz u neuralnu mrežu sa ciljem učenja različitih semantika koje su sadržane u svakoj emociji uzimajući u obzir posao SemEval. Izlazni sloj je prilagođen na osnovu karakteristika svakog podpitanja. Preliminarni rezultati dobiveni na određenom setu obuke ohrabruju nastavku istrage u ovom smjeru.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse NeuroSent süsteemi, mis osales SemEval 2018 ülesandes 1. Meie süsteem kasutab järelevalvet, mis põhineb närvivõrkudel ja sõnade manustamisel. Wordi manustamisel alustati kasutajate loodud arvustuste hoidlast. Seega on need spetsiifilised sentimentaalse analüüsi ülesannete jaoks. Seejärel konverteeritakse säutsud vastavasse vektorikujundusse ja antakse sisendina närvivõrku eesmärgiga õppida iga emotsiooni erinevat semantikat, mida SemEval ülesandes arvesse võetakse. Väljundkiht on kohandatud vastavalt iga alamülesande omadustele. Esitatud koolituskomplekti esialgsed tulemused on julgustavad uurimise jätkamiseks selles suunas.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém NeuroSent, který se podílel na SemEval 2018 Task 1. Náš systém má kontrolovaný přístup, který staví na neuronových sítích a slovních vloženích. Vložení slov bylo vytvořeno na základě repozitáře uživatelských recenzí. Jsou tedy specifické pro úkoly analýzy sentimentů. Poté jsou tweety převedeny do odpovídající vektorové reprezentace a předány jako vstup do neuronové sítě s cílem naučit se různé sémantiky obsažené v každé emoci zohledněné úlohou SemEval. Výstupní vrstva byla upravena na základě charakteristik každého dílčího úkolu. Předběžné výsledky získané na poskytnutém výcvikovém setu jsou povzbuzující pro pokračování šetření v tomto směru.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2018 -tehtävään 1 osallistunut NeuroSent-järjestelmä. Järjestelmämme noudattaa valvottua lähestymistapaa, joka perustuu neuroverkkoihin ja sanaupotuksiin. Wordin upotukset rakennettiin aloittamalla käyttäjien luomien arvostelujen arkistosta. Näin ollen ne ovat erityisiä tunteiden analysointitehtäviä varten. Tämän jälkeen tweetit muunnetaan vastaavaksi vektoriesitykseksi ja annetaan syötteenä neuroverkkoon tavoitteena oppia kunkin tunteen sisältämä semanttiikka, joka otetaan huomioon SemEval-tehtävässä. Lähtökerrosta on muokattu kunkin alatehtävän ominaisuuksien perusteella. Koulutuksesta saadut alustavat tulokset kannustavat jatkamaan tutkimusta tähän suuntaan.', 'jv': 'Ngetong iki rambarang pancen nggambar sistem Nuro Sent sing bisa ngupakan ni semebal 2020 task 1. Sistem awak dhéwé wis ngerasakno dadi apik dadi sing nggawe online alat lan gambaran banget. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Dadine, wong-wong kuwi cah pengguna kanggo didasahan seneng dadi. Tulung, Tulung mbubuti dipun mleksi ning repréntasi vector sing dumadhi lan nyimpen ingkang tambah Neral karo hal-hal kuwi tindakan semanti sing gawe ngubah sak omosi sing ngewehi tanggal gawe ngubah semanci sing dumadhi sak omosi sing ngendalikne seneng cara semi-ward The output layer has been Adjusted Pametuné awak dhéwé sing beraksi ning acara awak dhéwé nggawe ngulinggo kanggo nggunakake tarjamahan iki.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana shi na tsarin Neurosen wanda ya yi shirin aiki 1 na Semeval 2018. Tsarinmu ya ɗauki wani matsayi mai tsaro da ke samar a kan mitandatan neura da maganar da ke shiga. Word embeddings were built by starting from a repository of user generated reviews.  Wancan ne mafiya ƙayyade ga taskõkin hisãbi. Sa'an nan kuma aka musanya Twitter cikin mai daidaita matsayin shiryori kuma aka ba shi kamar an shigar da shi zuwa tarayya na neura, don ya yi amfani da in karanta masu mutane da aka ƙunsa da cikin kõwace hisia wanda aikin Semeval ke lissafa. An canza halin fitarwa a kan salon ƙayyade tsarin duk abun. Ana ƙiyayya matsala ta farko a kan daidaita mafarin da aka bã su aikin zartarwa zuwa wannan shirin.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכת NeuroSent שהשתתפה ב SemEval 2018 משימה 1. המערכת שלנו לוקחת גישה מפקחת שמבונה על רשתות עצביות וערכות מילים. Word embeddings were built by starting from a repository of user generated reviews.  כך, הם ספציפיים למשימות ניתוח רגשות. ואז, טוויטים הופכים באמצעות הוקטורים המתאימים ונותנים כתוצאה לרשת העצבית עם המטרה ללמוד את הסמנטיקה השונית שנמצאת בכל רגש שנלקחה בחשבון על ידי משימה הסימוול. The output layer has been adapted based on the characteristics of each subtask.  תוצאות קודמיות שנקבלו על קבוצת האימונים המסופקים מעודדות להמשיך בחקירה לכיוון הזה.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje sistem NeuroSent, ki je sodeloval v nalogi 1 SemEval 2018. Naš sistem uporablja nadzorovan pristop, ki temelji na nevronskih omrežjih in vgradnji besed. Wordove vdelave so bile zgrajene z začetkom iz skladišča uporabnikov ustvarjenih pregledov. Tako so specifični za naloge analize sentimenta. Nato se tviti pretvorijo v ustrezno vektorsko reprezentacijo in dajejo kot vhod v nevronsko omrežje z namenom učenja različnih semantik vsakega čustva, ki ga upošteva naloga SemEval. Izhodni sloj je bil prilagojen glede na značilnosti vsake podnaloge. Predhodni rezultati, pridobljeni na zagotovljenem naboru usposabljanja, so spodbudni za nadaljevanje preiskave v tej smeri.', 'bo': 'ཤོག ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་དང་ཐོག་མཛོད་ཀྱི་ལག་སྟར་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ་ལེན་པ་ཡིན། སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མཛུབ་རིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་ཞིབ དེར་བརྟེན། འདི་དག་སེམས་ཚོར་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཡིན། དེའི་རྗེས་སུ། Tweets are converted in the corresponding vector representation and given as input to the neural network with the aim of learning the different semantics contained in each emotion taken into account by the SemEval task. The output layer has been adapted based on the characteristics of each subtask. བྱིན་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་གྱི་གལ་སྡུད་དང་མཐའ་མ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་འདི་དག་གི་སྐྱེན་ཡོད་པས།'}
{'en': 'FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Combining LSTM States, Embeddings, and Lexical Features for Affect Analysis', 'ar': 'FOI DSS في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: الجمع بين حالات LSTM والتضمينات والميزات المعجمية لتحليل التأثير', 'es': 'DSS de FOI en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Combinación de estados de LSTM, incrustaciones y características léxicas para el análisis de efectos', 'pt': 'FOI DSS na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Combinando Estados LSTM, Incorporações e Recursos Léxicos para Análise de Afetos', 'fr': "FOI DSS au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Combiner les états LSTM, les intégrations et les caractéristiques lexicales pour l'analyse d'effet", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のFOI DSSタスク1 ：影響分析のためのLSTM状態、埋め込み、および語彙機能の組み合わせ', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018 务 1 上 FOI DSS:合 LSTM 、嵌、词法', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर FOI DSS: प्रभाव विश्लेषण के लिए LSTM राज्यों, एम्बेडिंग, और लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं का संयोजन', 'ru': 'FOI DSS на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Объединение состояний LSTM, вложений и лексических признаков для анализа воздействия', 'ga': 'Saoráil Faisnéise DSS ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Stáit LSTM, Leabaithe agus Gnéithe Lexical le haghaidh Anailís Tionchair a Chomhcheangal', 'ka': 'FOI DSS semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 1: LSTM შტატები, დაყენებები და ლექსიკური განსაზღვრებები შემდეგ ანალიზაციისთვის', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Συνδυασμός κρατών, Ενσωματώσεων και Λεξικών χαρακτηριστικών για την Ανάλυση Επιπτώσεων', 'hu': 'FOI DSS a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: LSTM állapotok, beágyazások és lexikai funkciók kombinálása az érintettelemzéshez', 'it': "FOI DSS a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Combinare stati LSTM, incorporazioni e funzionalità lessicali per l'analisi degli affetti", 'ms': 'FOI DSS di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Menggabung LSTM States, Embeddings, and Lexical Features for Affect Analysis', 'mk': 'FOI DSS на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Комбинирање на LSTM државите, вградувањата и лексикалните објекти за анализа на влијанието', 'kk': 'FOI DSS 1- тапсырмасында: LSTM күйін, ендіру және белсенді анализ үшін лексикалық қасиеттерді біріктіру', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1: LSTM രാജ്യങ്ങള്\u200d, എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d, ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷതകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷതകള്\u200d', 'lt': 'FOI DSS per 2018 m. pusmetį 1 užduotis: derinti LSTM valstybes, įrangą ir Lexical Features for Effect Analysis', 'mn': 'FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: combined LSTM States, Embeddings, and Lexical Features for Effects Analysis', 'no': 'FOI DSS på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Kombinerer LSTM-stat, innbygging og leksiske funksjonar for effektanalyser', 'sr': 'FOI DSS na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 1: kombinacija LSTM država, uključenja i leksičkih karakteristika za analizu utjecaja', 'mt': 'FOI DSS f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: It-taħlita ta’ Stati LSTM, Embeddings, u Karatteristiċi Lessiċi għall-Analiżi tal-Affetti', 'si': 'FOI DSS at HalfEvel-2018 Job 1: Combining LSTM States, Embeading, and Lexical Featuries for Affect Research', 'sv': 'FOI DSS på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Kombinera LSTM-tillstånd, inbäddningar och Lexiska funktioner för påverkanalys', 'pl': 'Zadanie 1: Łączenie stanów LSTM, osadzeń i funkcji leksykalnych do analizy efektów', 'ro': 'FOI DSS la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Combinarea statelor LSTM, a încorporărilor și a caracteristicilor Lexicale pentru analiza afectelor', 'so': 'FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Combining LSTM States, Embeddings, and Lexical Features for Affect Analysis', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 1: LSTM நாடுகள், உட்பொதிங்கள் மற்றும் விளைவு ஆய்வு', 'ur': 'FOI DSS نیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں: LSTM ایٹیٹوں، ایمبڈینگ، اور اثرات تحلیل کے لئے لکسیکس فوکتورز', 'uz': '1. Vazifani SemEval- 2018 bilan FOI DSS: Effekt Analysis uchun LSTM davlatlari, embedded va Leksika moslamalari', 'vi': 'dịch vụ FOI DSS ở Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task 1: kết hợp hợp hợp hợp hợp hợp hợp hợp bang LSTM, Emberings và ngôn ngữ dược cho kết quả phân tích nhạy bén', 'da': 'FOI DSS på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Kombination af LSTM-stater, indlejringer og leksikiske funktioner til påvirkningsanalyse', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Комбиниране на състояния, вграждания и лексикални характеристики за анализ на въздействието', 'hr': 'FOI DSS na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 1: kombinacija LSTM država, uključenja i leksičkih karaktera za analizu utjecaja', 'nl': 'FOI DSS bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Het combineren van LSTM-staten, embeddings en Lexical Features voor affectanalyse', 'de': 'FOI DSS bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Kombination von LSTM-Zuständen, Einbettungen und Lexika-Funktionen für die Affektanalyse', 'sw': 'DSS ya FOI katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Kuunganisha Nchi za LSTM, Mazingira na Tamko za Kilexico kwa Uchambuzi Huli', 'id': 'FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Combining LSTM States, Embeddings, and Lexical Features for Affect Analysis', 'ko': 'SemEval-18퀘스트1: LSTM상태, 삽입과 어휘특징을 결합하여 감정분석', 'fa': 'FOI', 'af': 'FOI DSS by SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Kombineer LSTM State, Inbêding en Leksiese Funksies vir Effekte Analisie', 'tr': 'FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Combining LSTM States, Embeddings, and Lexical Features for Affect Analysis', 'sq': 'FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Combining LSTM States, Embeddings, and Lexical Features for Affect Analysis', 'hy': 'Ֆոյ ԴՍՍ-ը 2018-ի կիսագնդի առաջին հանձնարարում. LSMT նահանգների, ներգրավման և ազդեցության վերլուծության լեքսիկական առանձնահատկությունների համադրումը', 'az': 'FOI DSS: LSTM eyaletlerini, İçindəriləndirmək və Etkileyici Analizi üçün Cənnətləşdirmək üçün', 'am': '1: Combining LSTM States, Embedding and Lexical Features for Affect Analysis', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ফোআই ডিএসএস ১: এলএসএমএস রাষ্ট্র, এমবেডিং এবং লেক্সিক্যাল বিশ্লেষণের জন্য বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'bs': 'FOI DSS na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 1: kombinacija LSTM država, uključenja i leksičkih karakteristika za analizu utjecaja', 'et': 'FOI DSS SemEval-2018 ülesanne 1: LSTM-i riikide, manustamiste ja leksifunktsioonide kombineerimine mõjuanalüüsiks', 'cs': 'Úkol 1: Kombinace LSTM stavů, vložení a Lexických funkcí pro analýzu efektů', 'fi': 'FOI DSS SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: LSTM-tilojen, upotusten ja Lexical-ominaisuuksien yhdistäminen vaikutusten analysointiin', 'ca': 'FOI DSS a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Combining LSTM States, Embeddings, and Lexical Features for Affect Analysis', 'jv': 'FOI dsS at semi-2008 task 1: Kombinng CST M valstis, embedembedings, and Lextaal Items for AfEffectt Test', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'FOI DSS na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Združevanje stanj LSTM, vdelav in leksičnih funkcij za analizo učinkov', 'he': 'FOI DSS ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: שילוב מדינות LSTM, תוכניות, ופונטים לקסיים לניתוח השפעות', 'bo': 'FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Combining LSTM States, Embeddings, and Lexical Features for Affect Analysis'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system used and results obtained for team FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Affect In Tweets. The team participated in all English language subtasks, with a method utilizing transfer learning from LSTM nets trained on large sentiment datasets combined with embeddings and lexical features. For four out of five subtasks, the system performed in the range of 92-95 % of the winning systems, in terms of the competition metrics. Analysis of the results suggests that improved pre-processing and addition of more lexical features may further elevate performance.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام المستخدم والنتائج التي تم الحصول عليها لفريق FOI DSS في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: التأثير في التغريدات. شارك الفريق في جميع المهام الفرعية للغة الإنجليزية ، بطريقة تستخدم التعلم التحويلي من شبكات LSTM المدربة على مجموعات بيانات المشاعر الكبيرة جنبًا إلى جنب مع حفلات الزفاف والميزات المعجمية. لأربع مهام فرعية من أصل خمس ، كان أداء النظام في نطاق 92-95٪ من الأنظمة الفائزة ، من حيث مقاييس المنافسة. يشير تحليل النتائج إلى أن المعالجة المسبقة المحسنة وإضافة المزيد من الميزات المعجمية قد تؤدي إلى رفع مستوى الأداء.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système utilisé et les résultats obtenus pour l'équipe FOI DSS lors de SEMEVAL-2018 Task 1\xa0: Affect In Tweets. L'équipe a participé à toutes les sous-tâches de langue anglaise, avec une méthode utilisant l'apprentissage par transfert à partir de réseaux LSTM formés sur de grands ensembles de données de sentiments combinés à des intégrations et des caractéristiques lexicales. Pour quatre sous-tâches sur cinq, le système a fonctionné dans la plage de 92 à 95\xa0% des systèmes gagnants, en termes de métriques de concurrence. L'analyse des résultats suggère que l'amélioration du prétraitement et l'ajout d'un plus grand nombre de caractéristiques lexicales peuvent encore améliorer les performances.", 'es': 'Este documento describe el sistema utilizado y los resultados obtenidos para el equipo FOI DSS en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Afectar en los Tweets. El equipo participó en todas las subtareas del idioma inglés, con un método que utiliza el aprendizaje por transferencia de redes LSTM capacitadas en grandes conjuntos de datos de opinión combinados con incrustaciones y funciones léxicas. Para cuatro de las cinco subtareas, el sistema funcionó en el rango del 92 al 95% de los sistemas ganadores, en términos de métricas de la competencia. El análisis de los resultados sugiere que el procesamiento previo mejorado y la adición de más características léxicas pueden mejorar aún más el rendimiento.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema utilizado e os resultados obtidos para a equipe FOI DSS no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Afete nos Tweets. A equipe participou de todas as subtarefas do idioma inglês, com um método que utiliza o aprendizado de transferência de redes LSTM treinadas em grandes conjuntos de dados de sentimentos combinados com incorporações e recursos lexicais. Para quatro das cinco subtarefas, o sistema executou na faixa de 92-95% dos sistemas vencedores, em termos de métricas de competição. A análise dos resultados sugere que o pré-processamento aprimorado e a adição de mais recursos lexicais podem elevar ainda mais o desempenho.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018 Task 1: Affect In TweetsでチームFOI DSSに使用されたシステムと得られた結果について説明する。チームはすべての英語サブタスクに参加し、埋め込みと辞書機能と組み合わせた大きなセンチメントデータセットでトレーニングされたLSTMネットからの転送学習を利用する方法を使用しました。5つのサブタスクのうち4つについては、競争指標の観点から、勝利システムの92 ～ 95 ％の範囲でシステムが実行されました。結果の分析は、改善された前処理およびより多くの語彙特徴の追加が、パフォーマンスをさらに向上させる可能性があることを示唆している。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 में टीम FOI DSS के लिए उपयोग किए गए सिस्टम और प्राप्त परिणामों का वर्णन करता है: Tweets में प्रभाव। टीम ने सभी अंग्रेजी भाषा के उप-कार्यों में भाग लिया, जिसमें एलएसटीएम नेट से स्थानांतरण सीखने का उपयोग करने वाली एक विधि थी, जो एम्बेडिंग और लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं के साथ संयुक्त बड़े भावना डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित थी। पांच उप-कार्यों में से चार के लिए, सिस्टम ने प्रतियोगिता मैट्रिक्स के संदर्भ में, जीतने वाली प्रणालियों के 92-95% की सीमा में प्रदर्शन किया। परिणामों के विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि बेहतर पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण और अधिक लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं के अलावा प्रदर्शन को और बढ़ा सकता है।', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2018务1:推其FOI DSS团队用之统得也。 凡团队参英语子务,其法因LSTM网络迁学,网络练于大情数集上,合销词汇之征。 五职四者,争指标而言,统于胜92-95%之限。 其分析表明改进预处理益多词汇或进一步提高性能。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается используемая система и результаты, полученные для команды FOI DSS на SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. Команда участвовала во всех подзадачах английского языка, используя метод обучения переносу из сетей LSTM, обученных на больших наборах данных настроений в сочетании с вложениями и лексическими особенностями. По четырем из пяти подзадач система работала в диапазоне 92-95% выигрышных систем, с точки зрения показателей конкуренции. Анализ результатов позволяет предположить, что улучшенная предварительная обработка и добавление более лексических признаков могут дополнительно повысить производительность.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a úsáideadh agus ar na torthaí a fuarthas don fhoireann FOI DSS ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Affect In Tweets. Ghlac an fhoireann páirt i ngach fothasc Béarla, le modh ag baint úsáide as foghlaim aistrithe ó líonta LSTM oilte ar thacair shonraí mhóra meon mar aon le leabaithe agus gnéithe foclóireachta. I gcás ceithre fhothasc as cúig, d'fheidhmigh an córas sa raon 92-95% de na córais bhuaiteacha, i dtéarmaí méadrachta an chomórtais. Tugann anailís ar na torthaí le fios go bhféadfadh réamhphróiseáil feabhsaithe agus gnéithe breise foclóireachta cur leis an bhfeidhmíocht a thuilleadh.", 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი გამოყენებული სისტემის და მიღებული შედეგი FOI DSS ჯგუფის SemEval-2018 დავალების 1: შემდეგი Tweets-ში. ბეჭდომა ყველა ანგლისური ენერგიის საბეჭდომაში დაწყება, რომელიც LSTM ქსელიდან გასწავლების გამოყენებას გამოყენება, რომელიც დიდი სინტემინტის მონაცემების საბეჭდომა და ხუთი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი სისტემის 92-95%-ის განმავლობაში გავაკეთებული სისტემის განმავლობაში. წარმოდგენების ანალიზაცია იგივეა, რომ უფრო მეტი ლექსიკალური ფუნქციების დამატება შეიძლება უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენა.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που χρησιμοποιήθηκε και τα αποτελέσματα που ελήφθησαν για την ομάδα FOI DSS στο έργο 1: Επίδραση στα tweets. Η ομάδα συμμετείχε σε όλες τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες της αγγλικής γλώσσας, με μια μέθοδο που χρησιμοποιεί τη μάθηση μεταφοράς από δίκτυα εκπαιδευμένα σε μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων συναισθημάτων σε συνδυασμό με ενσωμάτωση και λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά. Για τέσσερις στις πέντε δευτερεύουσες εργασίες, το σύστημα εκτελέστηκε στο εύρος 92-95% των νικηφόρων συστημάτων, όσον αφορά τις μετρήσεις ανταγωνισμού. Η ανάλυση των αποτελεσμάτων υποδηλώνει ότι η βελτιωμένη προεπεξεργασία και προσθήκη περισσότερων λεξικών χαρακτηριστικών μπορεί να αυξήσει περαιτέρω την απόδοση.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány ismerteti a FOI DSS csapatának használt rendszerét és eredményeit a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: befolyásolás tweetekben. A csapat részt vett az összes angol nyelvű részfeladatban, egy olyan módszerrel, amely LSTM hálózatokból származó transzfer tanulást használ, amelyeket nagy érzelmi adatkészletekre képzettek, beágyazásokkal és lexikai funkciókkal kombinálva. Az öt részfeladatból négy esetben a rendszer a nyertes rendszerek 92-95%-ában teljesített versenymutatók szempontjából. Az eredmények elemzése azt sugallja, hogy a jobb előfeldolgozás és a lexikai jellemzők hozzáadása tovább emelheti a teljesítményt.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema utilizzato e i risultati ottenuti per il team FOI DSS al SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. Il team ha partecipato a tutte le sottoattività in lingua inglese, con un metodo che utilizza l'apprendimento di trasferimento da reti LSTM addestrato su grandi set di dati sentiment combinati con incorporazioni e funzionalità lessicali. Per quattro sottoattività su cinque, il sistema ha funzionato nell'intervallo 92-95% dei sistemi vincenti, in termini di metriche di competizione. L'analisi dei risultati suggerisce che una migliore pre-elaborazione e l'aggiunta di caratteristiche lessicali possono aumentare ulteriormente le prestazioni.", 'lt': 'This paper describes the system used and results obtained for team FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets.  Grupė dalyvavo visuose anglų kalbos paklausimuose, taikant metodą, kuriuo naudojasi mokymosi perdavimu iš LSTM tinklų, apmokytų didelių jausmų duomenų rinkiniuose, kartu su įdėjimais ir leksiniais požymiais. Keturių iš penkių paklausymų atveju 92–95 % laimėtojų sistemų sistema vykdoma pagal konkurencijos rodiklius. Iš rezultatų analizės matyti, kad pagerintas išankstinis apdorojimas ir papildomi daugiau leksinių savybių gali dar labiau padidinti veiksmingumą.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува употребениот систем и резултатите добиени за тимот FOI DSS на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Влијание на твитови. Тимот учествуваше во сите подзадачи на англискиот јазик, со метод кој се користи трансфер учење од мрежите на ЛСТМ обучени на големи сентиментални податоци комбинирани со вградувања и лексички карактеристики. За четири од пет потпрашања, системот се спроведува во периодот од 92 до 95 отсто од победничките системи, во поглед на метриката на конкуренцијата. Анализата на резултатите покажува дека подобреното преобработување и додавањето на повеќе лексични карактеристики може да ја зголемат ефективноста.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз FOI DSS командасының бірінші тапсырмасында қолданылатын жүйені және нәтижелерін таңдайды. 1- тапсырма: Твиттерде әсер етеді. Барлық ағылшын тілінің субсаттарына қатысу тәсілді, LSTM желінен аудару оқыту арқылы, ендіру мен лексикалық мүмкіндіктермен біріктірілген үлкен сезімдер деректер қорларында оқылған үлке Бес субзаттардан төрт жүйе жеңілді жүйелердің 92-95% аумағында жасалған, конкурс метрикалығында. Нәтижелерді талдау үшін алдын- процессерді жақсарту және лексикалық мүмкіндіктерді қосу мүмкіндігін көтеруге болады.', 'ml': 'This paper describes the system used and results obtained for team FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets.  എല്ലാ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഭാഷ ഉപജോലികളിലും പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. എല്\u200dഎസ്റ്റിം നെറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിപ്പിച്ച അഞ്ച് സബ്ട്ടോസില്\u200d നാലുപേര്\u200dക്ക്, വിജയിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 92-95% പരിധിയില്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചു. ഫലങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണം മുന്നോട്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും കൂടുതല്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലും മെച്', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-2018 Task 1: Effect In Tweets-д гарсан FOI DSS баг болон ашиглагдсан системийг тайлбарладаг. Баг Англи хэлний сургуульд оролцсон, LSTM сүлжээгээс суралцах сургалтыг ашиглан том мэдрэмжтэй өгөгдлийн сангуудтай холбогдож байсан. Таван давхар сургалтын дөрвөн хувьд ялагдах системийн 92-95% хувьд өрсөлдөөний метрикийн хувьд хийгдсэн. Үр дүн шинжилгээний талаар илүү олон хэлний үйл ажиллагааг илүү өндөртэй болгох боломжтой гэсэн үг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet som vert brukt og resultatet for gruppa FOI DSS på semiEval- 2018 Oppgåve 1: Etter i tweeter. Gruppen delta delta i alle underspørsmål av engelsk språk, med ein metode som brukar læring av overføringar frå LSTM- nett treng på store sentimentdatasett kombinert med innbygging og leksiske funksjonar. For fire av fem underspørsmål utførte systemet i området av 92-95 % av vinningssystemet, ved høve av konkurransmetrikk. Analysering av resultatene foreslår at forbetra førehandsaming og tillegg av fleire leksiske funksjonar kan forbetra utviklinga.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje zastosowany system i wyniki uzyskane dla zespołu FOI DSS w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Affect In Tweets. Zespół uczestniczył we wszystkich podzadaniach języka angielskiego, metodą wykorzystującą naukę transferową z sieci LSTM przeszkolonych na dużych zbiorach danych sentymentów w połączeniu z osadzeniami i funkcjami leksykalnymi. W przypadku czterech na pięć podzadań system wykonywał się w zakresie 92-95% zwycięskich systemów, pod względem wskaźników konkurencji. Analiza wyników sugeruje, że lepsze przetwarzanie wstępne i dodanie więcej funkcji leksykalnych może jeszcze bardziej podnosić wydajność.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul utilizat și rezultatele obținute pentru echipa FOI DSS la SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. Echipa a participat la toate subactivitățile în limba engleză, cu o metodă care utilizează transferul de învățare din rețele LSTM instruit pe seturi mari de date sentiment combinate cu încorporări și caracteristici lexicale. Pentru patru din cinci subactivități, sistemul a funcționat în intervalul 92-95% din sistemele câștigătoare, în ceea ce privește valorile concurenței. Analiza rezultatelor sugerează că prelucrarea îmbunătățită și adăugarea mai multor caracteristici lexicale pot crește și mai mult performanța.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje korišteni sistem i rezultate dobiveni za tim FOI DSS na zadatku 1. na semiEval-2018: Afekt u Tweets. Tim je sudjelovao u svim podacima engleskog jezika, sa metodom korištenjem učenja prijenosa iz LSTM mreža obučenih na velikim podacima sentimenta kombinovanim sa ugrađenjem i leksičkim karakteristikama. Za četiri od pet podataka, sistem izvršen u rasponu od 92-95% pobjedničkih sustava, u smislu metrika konkurencije. Analiza rezultata ukazuje na to da bi se poboljšala predobrazovanje i dodavanje leksičkih karakteristika moglo povećati nastojanje.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka lagu isticmaalay iyo resultiyada lagaga helay kooxda FOI DSS ee SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. Kooxda waxay ka qeybqaadatay dhammaan shaqooyin afka ingiriiska ah, waxayna leeyihiin qaab ku isticmaalaya waxbarashada bedelka ee shabakada LSTM laga baranayo shabakada macluumaadka farsamada ee la xiriira meelaha la barto iyo faa’iido la xiriira. Shan maamul ka mid ah 4 nidaamka waxaa lagu sameyn jiray qiyaastii kooxaha guulaystay 92-95 % oo ka mid ah qaababka tartanka. Analyska arimaha waxaa ka muuqanaya in horumarinta ka horumarinta iyo ku daryeelka faa’iido la xiriira waxyaabaha la xiriira la xiriira waxaa sii kordhin kara horumarinta.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema użata u r-riżultati miksuba għat-tim FOI DSS f’SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. It-tim ipparteċipa fis-sottomistoqsijiet kollha tal-lingwa Ingliża, b’metodu li juża t-tagħlim tat-trasferiment minn xbieki LSTM imħarrġa fuq settijiet tad-dejta tas-sentimenti kbar flimkien ma’ inkorporazzjonijiet u karatteristiċi lexiċi. For four out of five subtasks, the system performed in the range of 92-95% of the winning systems, in terms of the competition metrics.  Analysis of the results suggests that improved pre-processing and addition of more lexical features may further elevate performance.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය කණ්ඩායම FOI DSS සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය විස්තර කරනවා සම්වේල-2018 වැඩ 1: ට්විට් වල ප්\u200dරවේශ කණ්ඩායම් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, LSTM ජාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ලොකු සංවේදනය ද පරීක්ෂණ පහයකින් හතරක් වෙනුවෙන්, පද්ධතිය දිනුන් පද්ධතියේ 92-95% විශේෂයෙන්, පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරනවා වගේම වඩා ලෙක්ස', 'ms': 'This paper describes the system used and results obtained for team FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets.  Pasukan berpartisipasi dalam semua sub-tanya bahasa Inggeris, dengan kaedah menggunakan pemindahan belajar dari rangkaian LSTM dilatih pada set data sentimen besar yang digabungkan dengan penyambungan dan ciri-ciri leksikal. For four out of five subtasks, the system performed in the range of 92-95% of the winning systems, in terms of the competition metrics.  Analisi keputusan menunjukkan bahawa peningkatan praproses dan tambahan ciri-ciri lebih leksikal boleh meningkatkan prestasi lebih lanjut.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver det system som använts och de resultat som erhållits för team FOI DSS vid SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Affect In Tweets. Teamet deltog i alla engelskspråkiga underuppgifter, med en metod som utnyttjade överföringsinlärning från LSTM-nät utbildade på stora sentimentdataset kombinerat med inbäddningar och lexikala funktioner. För fyra av fem deluppgifter presterade systemet i intervallet 92-95% av de vinnande systemen, när det gäller tävlingsmåtten. Analys av resultaten tyder på att förbättrad förbehandling och tillägg av mer lexikala funktioner kan ytterligare höja prestandan.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the system used and results obtained for team FOI DSS at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Effects in Tweets. تیم نے تمام انگلیسی زبان زیب سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ میں شامل کیا، ایک طریقہ سے LSTM نیٹ سے ترنس سینٹ سینٹ کے ذریعہ سے استعمال کیا ہے جو بڑے sentiment datasets پانچ سٹسٹ میں سے چار سٹسٹ کے لئے، سیسٹم نے غالب سیسٹم کے 92-95 درصد سے کامل کیا، مقابلہ متریک کے مطابق. نتائج کا تحلیل یہ سفارش دیتا ہے کہ اضافہ کرنا اور زیادہ لکسیکل فرضیات کا اضافہ کرنا بہت زیادہ اضافہ کرسکتا ہے.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறைமையை விவரிக்கும் மற்றும் குழு FOI DSS கிடைக்கப்பட்ட முடிவு இந்த குழு எல்லா ஆங்கிலத்தின் உப பணிகளிலும் பங்கிடப்பட்டது, LSTM வலைப்பின்னலிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் முறையில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது  ஐந்து துணை பணிகளில் நான்கு முறைமையில், போராட்டி முறைமைகளில் 92-95% வெற்றி முறைமைகளில் முறையில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது. முன் செயல்பாடு முன் செயல்படுத்தலை மேம்படுத்தி மற்றும் மேலும் லெக்சிகிள் குணங்களை சேர்க்கும் செயல்பாட்டை மே', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 Vazifalar 1: Twitterda Effekt oʻrnatilmoqda foydalanilgan tizimni tahrirlash va natijalari SemEval-2018 tashkilotlarida foydalanilgan FOI DSS guruhini anglatadi. Bu guruh hamma ingliz tili sub-vazifalarga ishlashdi, LSTM tarmoqlaridan o'rganishni o'rganish usuli bilan katta sentiment maʼlumotlar tizimi bilan bog'liq va leksikal imkoniyatlari bilan bog'langan. besh vazifalardan to'rtta vazifalar uchun tizimning 92-95% darajada muvaffaqiyatli tizimga bajarildi. @ info", 'vi': "Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống được sử dụng và kết quả kết quả cho đội FOI DSS tại Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task 1: chìm trong Tweet. Đội đã tham gia tất cả các câu hỏi bằng tiếng Anh, với một phương pháp dịch chuyển học từ các lưới LSTM được huấn luyện trên các tập tin đa cảm lớn kết hợp với sự nhúng tay và tính năng ngôn ngữ. Đối với bốn phần năm phụ đề, hệ thống được thực hiện trong phạm vi 995='của hệ thống thắng lợi, theo dạng đo cạnh tranh. Phân tích kết quả cho thấy việc cải tiến tiến tiến tiến tính thuốc trước và thêm các tính năng ngôn ngữ có thể nâng cao khả năng.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва използваната система и получените резултати за екипа на Задача 1: Въздействие в туитове. Екипът участва във всички подзадачи по английски език с метод, използващ трансферно обучение от мрежи обучени върху големи набори от данни за сентименти, съчетани с вграждания и лексикални функции. За четири от пет подзадачи системата се представи в диапазона от 92-95% от печелившите системи по отношение на показателите за конкуренцията. Анализът на резултатите показва, че подобрената предварителна обработка и добавянето на повече лексикални характеристики могат допълнително да повишат производителността.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver det anvendte system og resultater opnået for team FOI DSS på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Påfør Tweets. Teamet deltog i alle engelsksprogede underopgaver med en metode, der brugte overførselslæring fra LSTM-net trænet på store sentimentdatasæt kombineret med indlejringer og leksikalske funktioner. For fire ud af fem underopgaver udførte systemet i intervallet 92-95% af de vindende systemer, hvad angår konkurrencemålingerne. Analyse af resultaterne tyder på, at forbedret forhåndsbehandling og tilføjelse af mere leksikske funktioner kan øge ydeevnen yderligere.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het gebruikte systeem en de behaalde resultaten voor team FOI DSS bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Affect In Tweets. Het team nam deel aan alle Engelstalige subtaken, met een methode die gebruikmaakte van transfer learning van LSTM netten getraind op grote sentiment datasets gecombineerd met embeddings en lexicale functies. Voor vier van de vijf subtaken presteerde het systeem in het bereik van 92-95% van de winnende systemen, wat betreft de competitiestatistieken. Analyse van de resultaten suggereert dat verbeterde voorbewerking en toevoeging van meer lexicale kenmerken de prestaties verder kunnen verbeteren.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje korišteni sustav i rezultate dobiti za tim FOI DSS na zadatku 1. na semiEval-2018: utjecaj na Tweets. Tim je sudjelovao u svim podacima engleskog jezika, s metodom korištenjem učenja prijenosa iz LSTM mreža obučenih na velikim podacima osjećaja kombiniranom sa ugrađenjem i leksičkim karakteristikama. Za četiri od pet podataka, sustav izvršen u rasponu od 92-95% pobjedničkih sustava u smislu metrika konkurencije. Analiza rezultata ukazuje na to da bi poboljšanje predobrazovanja i dodavanje leksičkih karakteristika moglo dodatno povećati učinkovitost.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das verwendete System und die erzielten Ergebnisse für Team FOI DSS bei SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. Das Team nahm an allen Teilaufgaben in englischer Sprache teil, wobei Transferlernen aus LSTM-Netzen verwendet wurde, die auf großen Sentiment-Datensätzen trainiert wurden, kombiniert mit Einbettungen und lexikalischen Funktionen. Für vier von fünf Teilaufgaben erbrachte das System im Bereich von 92-95% der Siegersysteme, was die Wettbewerbsmetriken angeht. Die Analyse der Ergebnisse deutet darauf hin, dass eine verbesserte Vorverarbeitung und das Hinzufügen von mehr lexikalischen Merkmalen die Leistung weiter steigern können.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18 임무 1: 트윗의 영향을 받았을 때 팀 FOI DSS가 사용한 시스템과 얻은 결과를 기술한다.이 팀은 모든 영어 하위 임무에 참여했고 LSTM 네트워크를 이용하여 이동 학습을 하는 방법을 채택했다. 이 네트워크는 삽입과 어휘 특징을 결합한 대형 감정 데이터 집합에서 훈련을 한다.경쟁 지표를 보면 5분의 4의 하위 임무 중 시스템은 92-95%의 승리 시스템에서 양호하게 나타난다.결과에 대한 분석에 따르면 예처리를 개선하고 더 많은 어휘 특징을 첨가하면 성능을 더욱 높일 수 있다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang digunakan dan hasil yang diperoleh untuk tim FOI DSS di SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. Tim berpartisipasi dalam semua subtasks bahasa Inggris, dengan metode menggunakan transfer belajar dari jaringan LSTM dilatih pada set data sentimen besar bergabung dengan embedding dan karakteristik lexik. Untuk empat dari lima subtasks, sistem dilakukan dalam jangkauan 92-95% dari sistem pemenang, dalam terma metrik kompetisi. Analisi hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa peningkatan pra-proses dan tambahan karakteristik lebih leksik dapat meningkatkan prestasi lebih lanjut.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo uliotumika na matokeo yaliyopatikana kwa timu ya FOI DSS kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018: Inaathiri kwenye twita. Timu hiyo ilishiriki katika majukumu yote ya lugha ya Kiingereza, kwa njia ya kutumia kujifunza kwa usafirishaji kutoka kwenye mtandao wa LSTM yaliyofundishwa kwenye seti kubwa za hisia zinazohusiana na vipengele vya lexico. Kwa nne kati ya kazi tano, mfumo uliofanywa katika kiwango cha asilimia 92-95 ya mfumo wa kushinda, kwa mujibu wa mbinu za mashindano. Uchambuzi wa matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba kuboresha upasuaji wa kabla na kuongeza vipengele vya uchochezi vinaweza kuongezeka zaidi performance.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf die stelsel gebruik en resultate ontvang vir team FOI DSS by SemEval- 2018 Taak 1: Afteken in Tweets. Die span het gedeel in alle Engelse taal subtaske, met 'n metode wat oordrag leer gebruik word van LSTM netwerke wat op groot sentiment datastel opgelei is, gekombineer met inbêring en leksiese funksies. Vir vier uit vyf subtaske het die stelsel uitgevoer in die omvang van 92-95% van die winsstelsels, ingevolge die samenskap metriek. Analiseer van die resultate beveel dat die verbeterde voorafverandering en byvoeging van meer leksiese funksies kan verder uitvoer.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz sistemini SemEval-2018 Taýýarlary üçin ulanylýan we netijeleri bardyr Topar iňlisçe diller subtasklarynda, LSTM netlerden öwrenmek üçin ullanýan möhüm duýgular setirleri bilen birleştirilýär. Beş alt askardan dört sany üçin ýeňiji sistemalaryň 92-95% arasynda ýeňiji sistemalar üçin ýeňildi. Netijeleriň analysi ön işleýän we köp karakterleriň üstine ýagdaýynyň üstine ýokary bolmagyny maslahat berýär.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم استفاده شده و نتیجه برای تیم FOI DSS در کار ۱: اثر در تویتها است. تیم در تمام زبان انگلیسی شرکت کرد، با یک روش استفاده از یادگیری انتقال از شبکه های LSTM آموزش داده شده در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای احساسات بزرگ با ویژه\u200cهای ابتدایی و زبان\u200cشناسی. برای چهار از پنج زیر سؤال سیستم در مجموعه ۲۹-۹۵ درصد سیستم برنده، در نظر متریک رقابت انجام شد. تحلیل نتایج پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که پیش\u200cپردازش و اضافه کردن ویژه\u200cهای زبانی بیشتری می\u200cتواند عملکرد بیشتر بالا ببرد.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የድምፅ ስርዓት በሴmEval-2018 ስራ ላይ ለteam FOI DSS የተገኘውን ውጤቶች ይናገራል፡፡ ቡድን በንግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ ደብዳቤዎችን ሁሉ ተጋጠመ፤ ከLSTM መረብ መማር በመጠቀም የልዩ ስሜት ዳታተሮችን በመጠቀም እና የሊክሲካዊ ምርጫዎች በተጠቃቀሙ የደረጃ ማቀናቀል ሥርዓት ተጋጠመ፡፡ ከአምስት ደብዳቤዎች አራት፣ ሲስተምሩ በ92-95 በመቶ ክፍል ውስጥ ያሸንፋል፡፡ የፍሬዎቹን ማስታወቂያ አስቀድሞ ፕሮጀክት ማሻሻል እና የሌክሲካዊ ምርጫዎችን መጨመር ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է օգտագործված համակարգը և ստացված արդյունքները, որոնք ստացվել են խմբի FoI DSS-ի համար The team participated in all English language subtasks, with a method utilizing transfer learning from LSTM nets trained on large sentiment datasets combined with embeddings and lexical features.  Հինգ ենթահարցերից 4-ը համակարգը կատարվել է հաղթանակի համակարգերի 92-95 տոկոսի տարածքում մրցակցության մետրերի տեսքով: Արդյունքների վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ բարելավված նախավերամշակման և ավելին լեքսիկական հատկությունների ավելացումը կարող է շարունակել բարձրացնել արդյունքը:', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin e përdorur dhe rezultatet e fituara për ekipin FOI DSS në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. Ekipi mori pjesë në të gjitha nëndetyrat e gjuhës angleze, me një metodë duke përdorur transferimin e mësimit nga rrjetet LSTM të trajnuar në grupe të dhënash të mëdha të ndjenjave të kombinuara me përfshirje dhe karakteristika lexike. Për katër nga pesë nënpyetje, sistemi u krye në intervalin 92-95% të sistemeve fituese, lidhur me metrikat e konkurrencës. Analiza e rezultateve sugjeron se përmirësimi i paraprocesimit dhe shtimi i karakteristikave më leksikale mund të rritë performancën më tej.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje korišteni sistem i rezultate dobiveni za tim FOI DSS na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Afekt u Tweets. Tim je sudjelovao u svim podacima engleskog jezika, sa metodom korištenjem učenja prijenosa iz LSTM mreža obučenih na velikim podacima sentimenta kombinovanim sa ugrađenjem i leksičkim karakteristikama. Za četiri od pet podataka, sistem izvršen u rasponu od 92-95% pobjedničkih sustava u smislu metrika konkurencije. Analiza rezultata ukazuje na to da bi se poboljšala predobrazovanje i dodavanje leksičkih karakteristika moglo dodatno povećati učinkovitost.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu el sistema utilitzat i els resultats obtenits per a l'equip FOI DSS a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. L'equip va participar en totes les subtaskes del llenguatge anglès, amb un mètode que utilitzava l'aprenentatge de transfer ència de xarxes LSTM entrenats en grans conjunts de dades de sentiment combinats amb incorporacions i característiques lexiques. Per quatre de cada cinc subpreguntes, el sistema va funcionar entre el 92% i el 95% dels sistemes guanyadors, en termes de mètriques de competició. L'anàlisi dels resultats suggereix que la millora del pré-processament i l'afecció de característiques més lexiques poden augmentar encara més el rendiment.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt, FOI DSS tayfası üçün istifadə edilən sistemi və sonuçlarını semiEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets içində təsirləndirir. Tüm İngilizə dilində bütün subtasklara katıldı, LSTM a ğlarından öyrənməyi istifadə etmək üçün böyük duygusal veri qurğuları ilə birləşdirilmiş bütün məlumat qurğuları ilə birləşdirilmiş şəkildə istifadə edilən bir metod ilə. Beş subtasklardan dörd dəfə istifadə edilən sistem qələbə sistemlərinin səviyyəsində 92-95%, müqayisədə metrikləri ilə istifadə edildi. Sonuçların analizi təmin edir ki, əvvəlcə işləmə və daha çox leksik xüsusiyyətlərin əlavə edilməsi daha yüksək olar.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১: টুইটে প্রভাবিত। এই দল সকল ইংরেজি ভাষার সাবটাকাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে, যেখানে এলস্টিএম নেটওয়ার্ক থেকে ট্রান্সফারেন্স শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে বিশাল অনুভূতির ডাটাসেট পাঁচটি সাবটাসের মধ্যে চারজনের জন্য এই সিস্টেম প্রতিযোগিতার প্রতিযোগিতার মেটিকের মাধ্যমে ৯২-৯৫% বিজয়ী সিস্টেমের সী ফলাফলের বিশ্লেষণ পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে পূর্ব প্রক্রিয়ার উন্নতি এবং আরও লেক্সিক্সিয়াল বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী যোগ করা সম্ভব।', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje použitý systém a výsledky získané pro tým FOI DSS na SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets. Tým se podílel na všech dílčích úkolech anglického jazyka metodou využívající transferové učení z LSTM sítí trénované na velkých sentimentových datových sadách v kombinaci s vložením a lexikálními funkcemi. U čtyř z pěti dílčích úkolů se systém prováděl v rozsahu 92-95% vítězných systémů, pokud jde o metriky soutěže. Analýza výsledků naznačuje, že lepší předzpracování a přidání více lexikálních vlastností může dále zvýšit výkon.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meeskonna FOI DSS kasutatud süsteemi ja saadud tulemusi SemEval-2018 ülesandes 1: mõju tweetides. Meeskond osales kõigis inglise keele alamülesannetes, kasutades LSTM-i võrkudest ülekandeõpet, mis on koolitatud suurte sentimentaalsete andmekogumitega kombineeritud manustamise ja leksikaalsete funktsioonidega. Nelja viiest alamülesandest oli süsteem konkurentsimõõdikute osas 92–95% võitnud süsteemidest. Tulemuste analüüs näitab, et parem eeltöötlus ja rohkem leksikaalseid funktsioone lisamine võib veelgi suurendada jõudlust.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan tiimin FOI DSS:n käyttämä järjestelmä ja tulokset SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets -tapahtumassa. Tiimi osallistui kaikkiin englannin kielen alatehtäviin menetelmällä, jossa hyödynnettiin siirtooppimista LSTM-verkoista, jotka oli koulutettu suuriin tunneaineistoihin yhdistettynä upotuksiin ja sanastoominaisuuksiin. Neljässä viidestä alitehtävästä järjestelmä suoritti 92–95% voittaneista järjestelmistä kilpailumittareiden osalta. Tulosten analyysi viittaa siihen, että parempi esikäsittely ja sanastollisten ominaisuuksien lisääminen voivat parantaa suorituskykyä entisestään.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מתאר את המערכת השתמשת והתוצאות שנקבלו עבור צוות FOI DSS ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: השפעה בטוויטים. הצוות השתתף בכל השאלות בשפה האנגלית, עם שיטה להשתמש בהעברה ללמוד מרשתות LSTM מאומנות על קבוצות מידע רגשות גדולות ביחד עם תוכניות וקסמיות. במשך ארבעה מתוך חמישה תחתונות, המערכת ביצעה בטווח של 92-95% מהמערכות הנצחונות, במטריות התחרות. ניתוח התוצאות מצביע שיפור לפני העבודה ותוסף של תכונות לקסיות נוספות יכול להעלות את ההופעה.', 'ha': "Wannan avir yana bayyana na'urar da aka yi amfani da matsalar da aka samu matsalar wa team FI DSS at SemEl-2018 Tafiyar 1: Affect In Twitter. Team ya yi shirin duk taskõkin harshen Ingiriya, da wata metode ta yi amfani da mai motsi da za'a iya amfani da shirya wa masu motsi daga LSSM na'urar da aka sanar da shi a kan data masu girma na haɗi da embedding and lex feature. Akwai huɗu daga shan subaikin, na'urar, yana tafiyar cikin tsakanin na 92-95% da za'a rinjãyi, cikin tsakanin taƙaitori. Analysis of the results suggests that improved pre-processing and addition of more lexical features may further elevate performance.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje uporabljeni sistem in rezultate, pridobljene za ekipo FOI DSS na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Vpliv v tweets. Ekipa je sodelovala pri vseh podnalogah angleškega jezika z metodo, ki je uporabljala prenosno učenje iz LSTM mrež, usposobljenih na velikih naborih podatkov o sentimentalnih podatkih v kombinaciji z vdelavami in leksikalnimi funkcijami. Za štiri od petih podnalog je sistem opravil v razponu 92-95% zmagovalnih sistemov, kar zadeva meritve tekmovanja. Analiza rezultatov kaže, da lahko izboljšana predobdelava in dodajanje več leksikalnih značilnosti dodatno povečata učinkovitost.', 'jv': 'This paper description the System used and output available for group FOI dsS at semi-2008 task 1: AfEffectt In Two Grupo sing membah ning saben tarjamahan ingkang saben, karo sistem sing gambar nggawe tarjamahan kanggo kalaman sistem sing di nggambar LTT M nets sing dituruti dataset luwih apik sing dirangkamu karo ingkang lan keleksi. Ndheke apat sing sepatu basa sing dibutuhke, sistem sing bisa dianggo luwih-luwih ambekan ning aram sing ditambah, sing mengko dolanan ambekan karo Metika sing bisa ambekan. Ndeleksyon perusahaan akeh dadi kagunakake supoyo akeh-perusahaan sampeyan karo nambah luwih dumateng akeh luwih dumateng.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལག་ལེན་པའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་གནད་སྡུད་གྱི་FOI DSS ལ་SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect In Tweets ཐོག་ལས། The team participated in all English language subtasks, with a method utilizing transfer learning from LSTM nets trained on large sentiment datasets combined with embeddings and lexical features. For four of five subtasks, the system performed in the range of 92-95% of the winning systems, in terms of the competition metrics. གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དག་གིས་སྔ་གོང་ལས་སྦྱོར་བ་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན'}
{'en': 'NLPZZX at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Using Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination', 'ar': 'NLPZZX في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: استخدام طريقة المجموعة لتحديد شدة العاطفة والمشاعر', 'es': 'NLPZZX en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Uso del método de conjunto para la determinación de la intensidad de emociones y sentimientos', 'pt': 'NLPZZX na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Usando o Método de Conjunto para Determinação de Intensidade de Emoção e Sentimento', 'fr': "NLPZZX au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Utilisation de la méthode d'ensemble pour la détermination de l'intensité des émotions et des sentiments", 'ja': 'NLPZZX at SemEval -2018タスク1 ：感情と感情の強度決定のためのアンサンブルメソッドの使用', 'zh': 'NLPZZXåœ¨SemEval-2018åŠ¡1:ä»¥é›†æƒ…åº¦ä¹‹', 'ru': 'NLPZZX на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Использование ансамблевого метода для определения эмоциональной и сентиментальной интенсивности', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर NLPZZX: भावना और भावना तीव्रता निर्धारण के लिए पहनावा विधि का उपयोग करना', 'ga': 'NLPZZX ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Modh Ensemble a Úsáid chun Mothúchán agus Déine Mothúcháin a Chinneadh', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'NLPZZX a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Ensemble módszer használata érzelmi és érzelmi intenzitás meghatározására', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Χρήση της μεθόδου συνόλου για τον προσδιορισμό της έντασης συναισθημάτων και συναισθημάτων', 'it': "NLPZZX a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Utilizzo del metodo Ensemble per la determinazione dell'intensità delle emozioni e dei sentimenti", 'lt': 'NLPZZX 2010 m. pusės vertinimo 1 užduotis: taikyti bendrą emocijos ir jautrumo intensyvumo nustatymo metodą', 'mk': 'NLPZZX на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Користење на Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination', 'kk': 'NLPZZX жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында 1- тапсырма: көңіл көңіл және сезімді қанықтығын анықтау әдісін қолдану', 'ms': 'NLPZZX at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Using Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1- ല്\u200d NLPZX: ഇമോട്ടിഷനും സെന്റിമെന്റ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിനുമുള്ള ഏകാധിക രീതി', 'mn': 'NLPZZX at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination', 'mt': 'NLPZZX f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: L-użu ta’ Metodu Ensemble għad-Determinazzjoni tal-Intensità tal-Emożizzjoni u s-Sentiment', 'pl': 'NLPZZX w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Wykorzystanie metody zespołowej do określenia intensywności emocji i sentymentów', 'ro': 'NLPZZX la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Utilizarea metodei ansamblului pentru determinarea intensității emoțiilor și sentimentelor', 'no': 'NLPZZX ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Bruk metode for å forstømme emosjon og følgjande intensitet', 'si': 'NLPZZX at Halfeval-2018 Job 1: Ensemble Metodom for Emotion and Sentiment Intensty Detection', 'so': 'NLPZX at SemEval-2018 Shaqada 1: Isku isticmaalka qalabka Emotion iyo Heeganka', 'sr': 'NLPZZX na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: korištenje metode proširenja emocija i određivanja sentimentalne intenzitete', 'ta': 'NLPZZX at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Using Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination', 'sv': 'NLPZZX på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Använda Ensemblemetod för bestämning av känslointensitet och känslointensitet', 'ur': 'NLPZZX نصف-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں: Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination کے لئے Ensemble Method استعمال کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Vazifani SemEval- 2018 bilan NLPZX 1: Emotionary va Sentiment Intensity aniqlashdan foydalanish', 'vi': 'NLZZZZX ở SemEvl-208 Task 1: Dùng Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentron intensity detectition', 'nl': 'NLPZZX bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Ensemblemethode gebruiken voor de bepaling van emotie en sentimentintensiteit', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Използване на ансамбълен метод за определяне на емоцията и интензивността на сентимента', 'de': 'NLPZZX bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 1: Einsatz der Ensemblemethode zur Bestimmung von Emotionen und Empfindungsintensität', 'da': 'NLPZZX på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Brug Ensemble Metode til bestemmelse af følelses- og følelsesintensitet', 'ko': 'NLPZX가SemEval-2018에서의 퀘스트 1: 집적 방법을 사용하여 정서와 정서의 강도를 확정한다', 'sw': 'NLPZZX katika SemEval-2018 Kazi 1: Utumiaji wa Utafiti wa Uchunguzi na Uchunguzi wa SemEval-2018', 'id': 'NLPZZX di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Menggunakan Metode Ensemble untuk Determinasi Emosi dan Intensitas Sentiment', 'af': 'NLPZZX by SemEval- 2018 Opdrag 1: Gebruik Ensemble Metode vir Emotie en Sentiment Intensiteit Bestemming', 'tr': 'NLPZZX at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination', 'hr': 'NLPZZX na pola evaluacije-2018 zadatak 1: Koristenje metode uključivanja osjećaja i određivanja osjećajne intenzitete', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'fa': 'Name', 'bn': 'NLPZZX at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Using Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination', 'hy': 'ՆԼՊԶՉՍ 2018-ի կիսագնդի առաջին հանձնարարությունը՝ զգացմունքների և զգացմունքների խիստ որոշումների միասնական մեթոդ օգտագործելը', 'sq': 'NLPZZX në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Using Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination', 'ca': "NLPZZX a SemEval-2018 tasca 1: Utilitzar un mètode conjunt per a determinar l'emoció i la intensitat del sentiment", 'cs': 'NLPZZX na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Použití souborové metody pro stanovení emoční a citové intenzity', 'et': 'NLPZZX SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Ensembli meetodi kasutamine emotsioonide ja tunnete intensiivsuse määramiseks', 'fi': 'NLPZZX SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination', 'az': "SemEval-2018 Task 1'də NLPZZX: Emosiya və Sentiment Intensity Determination Methodi istifadə edilir", 'bs': 'NLPZZX na pola evaluacije-2018 zadatak 1: Koristenje metode uključivanja emocija i određivanja osjećajne intenzitete', 'jv': 'NLPZ', 'he': 'NLPZZX ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 1: השימוש בשיטה מסודרת לקבוע חוש רגש', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'NLPZZX na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Uporaba ansamblne metode za določanje čustev in intenzivnosti sentimenta', 'bo': 'NLPZZX at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Using Ensemble Method for Emotion and Sentiment Intensity Determination'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we put forward a system that competed at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Affect in Tweets. Our system uses a simple yet effective ensemble method which combines several neural network components. We participate in two subtasks for English tweets : EI-reg and V-reg. For two subtasks, different combinations of neural components are examined. For EI-reg, our system achieves an accuracy of 0.727 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (all instances) and an accuracy of 0.555 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0.5-1). For V-reg, the achieved accuracy scores are respectively 0.835 and 0.670', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، طرحنا نظامًا تنافس في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: "التأثير في التغريدات". يستخدم نظامنا طريقة تجميع بسيطة وفعالة تجمع بين العديد من مكونات الشبكة العصبية. نشارك في مهمتين فرعيتين للتغريدات الإنجليزية: EI-reg و V-reg. بالنسبة إلى مهمتين فرعيتين ، يتم فحص مجموعات مختلفة من المكونات العصبية. بالنسبة لـ EI-reg ، يحقق نظامنا دقة قدرها 0.727 في معامل ارتباط بيرسون (جميع الحالات) ودقة تبلغ 0.555 في معامل ارتباط بيرسون (0.5-1). بالنسبة إلى V-reg ، كانت درجات الدقة المحققة على التوالي 0.835 و 0.670', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un sistema que compitió en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: «Efecto en los Tweets». Nuestro sistema utiliza un método de ensamblaje simple pero efectivo que combina varios componentes de redes neuronales. Participamos en dos subtareas para tuits en inglés: EI-reg y V-reg. Para dos subtareas, se examinan diferentes combinaciones de componentes neuronales. Para EI-reg, nuestro sistema logra una precisión de 0.727 en el Coeficiente de Correlación de Pearson (todos los casos) y una precisión de 0.555 en el Coeficiente de Correlación de Pearson (0.5-1). Para V-reg, las puntuaciones de precisión alcanzadas son, respectivamente, 0,835 y 0,670', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons un système qui a participé à la tâche 1 de SEMEval-2018\xa0: «\xa0Affect in Tweets\xa0». Notre système utilise une méthode d'ensemble simple mais efficace qui combine plusieurs composants de réseaux neuronaux. Nous participons à deux sous-tâches pour les tweets en anglais\xa0: EI-Reg et V-Reg. Pour deux sous-tâches, différentes combinaisons de composants neuronaux sont examinées. Pour EI-Reg, notre système atteint une précision de 0,727 pour le coefficient de corrélation de Pearson (toutes les instances) et une précision de 0,555 pour le coefficient de corrélation de Pearson (0,5-1). Pour V-reg, les scores de précision obtenus sont respectivement de 0,835 et 0,670", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um sistema que concorreu no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: “Afeto nos Tweets”. Nosso sistema usa um método de conjunto simples, mas eficaz, que combina vários componentes de rede neural. Participamos de duas subtarefas para tweets em inglês: EI-reg e V-reg. Para duas subtarefas, diferentes combinações de componentes neurais são examinadas. Para EI-reg, nosso sistema atinge uma precisão de 0,727 no coeficiente de correlação de Pearson (todas as instâncias) e uma precisão de 0,555 no coeficiente de correlação de Pearson (0,5-1). Para V-reg, as pontuações de precisão alcançadas são, respectivamente, 0,835 e 0,670', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018タスク1「Tweetsへの影響」で競合したシステムを提唱した。当社のシステムは、いくつかのニューラルネットワークコンポーネントを組み合わせた、シンプルでありながら効果的なアンサンブル方法を使用しています。英語のツイートには、EI - regとV - regの2つのサブタスクがあります。２つのサブタスクについて、神経成分の異なる組み合わせを調べた。EI - regの場合、当社のシステムはPearson相関係数（すべてのインスタンス）で0.727、Pearson相関係数（ 0.5-1 ）で0.555の精度を達成しています。V - regについては、達成精度スコアはそれぞれ0.835、0.670である。', 'zh': '本文有SemEval-2018务1争统推文。 吾统用一简而效者,合数神经网络组件。 吾与英语推文二子:EI-reg与V-reg。 其於二子,比神经组件之不同。 EI-reg者,皮尔逊相关系数(之)也,0.727之精也,皮尔逊相关系数(0.5-1)之0.555也。 其于V-reg,得精度分数为0.8350.670', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हमने एक ऐसी प्रणाली को आगे बढ़ाया जो SemEval-2018 टास्क 1 में प्रतिस्पर्धा करता है: "ट्वीट्स में प्रभाव"। हमारा सिस्टम एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी पहनावा विधि का उपयोग करता है जो कई तंत्रिका नेटवर्क घटकों को जोड़ता है। हम अंग्रेजी tweets के लिए दो subtasks में भाग लेते हैं: EI-reg और V-reg. दो उप-कार्यों के लिए, तंत्रिका घटकों के विभिन्न संयोजनों की जांच की जाती है। EI-reg के लिए, हमारी प्रणाली पियर्सन सहसंबंध गुणांक (सभी उदाहरणों) में 0.727 की सटीकता और पियर्सन सहसंबंध गुणांक (0.5-1) में 0.555 की सटीकता प्राप्त करती है। V-reg के लिए, प्राप्त सटीकता स्कोर क्रमशः 0.835 और 0.670 हैं', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы выдвинули систему, которая конкурировала на SemEval-2018 Task 1: “Affect in Tweets”. Наша система использует простой, но эффективный ансамблевый метод, который объединяет несколько компонентов нейронной сети. Мы участвуем в двух подзадачах для английских твитов: EI-reg и V-reg. Для двух подзадач исследуются различные комбинации нейронных компонентов. Для EI-reg наша система достигает точности 0,727 по коэффициенту корреляции Пирсона (все экземпляры) и точности 0,555 по коэффициенту корреляции Пирсона (0,5-1). Для V-reg достигнутые баллы точности составляют соответственно 0,835 и 0,670', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, chuireamar córas chun cinn a bhí san iomaíocht ag Tasc 1 SemEval-2018: “Affect in Tweets”. Úsáideann ár gcóras modh ensemble simplí ach éifeachtach a chomhcheanglaíonn roinnt comhpháirteanna líonra néaracha. Glacaimid páirt in dhá fhothasc le haghaidh tweets Béarla: EI-reg agus V-reg. Maidir le dhá fhothasc, déantar teaglaim éagsúla de chomhpháirteanna néaracha a scrúdú. Maidir le EI-reg, sroicheann ár gcóras cruinneas 0.727 i gComhéifeacht Comhghaoil Pearson (gach cás) agus cruinneas 0.555 i gComhéifeacht Comhghaoil Pearson (0.5-1). I gcás V-reg, is iad na scóir chruinneas a baineadh amach ná 0.835 agus 0.670 faoi seach', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ დავიწყეთ სისტემა, რომელიც semiEval-2018 დავაკეთებულია სამუშაო დავაკეთებულია 1-ში: შემდეგ Tweets-ში. ჩვენი სისტემის გამოყენება მარტივი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური ინსენბლის მეტი, რომელიც მრავალ ნეიროლური ქსელის კომპონენტების შემდე ჩვენ ვიყავით ინგლისური ტივიტების ორი საკუთარი საკუთარი შესახებ: EI-reg და V-reg. ორი საშუალებაზე განსხვავებული ნეიროლური კომპონენტების კომპონენტების კომპონენტების კომპონენტების კომბიციაციები EI-reg-სთვის ჩვენი სისტემა 0,727-ის კოეფიციენტის კოეფიციენტის კოეფიციენტის კოეფიციენტის კოეფიციენტის კოეფიციენტის (ყველა შემთხვევაში) და 0,555-ის კოეფიციენტის კოეფიციენტის კოეფი V', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban előterjesztettünk egy olyan rendszert, amely a SemEval-2018 1. feladaton versenyzett: "Hatás a tweetekben". Rendszerünk egy egyszerű, mégis hatékony együttes módszert alkalmaz, amely több neurális hálózati komponenst ötvöz. Az angol tweetekhez két részfeladatban veszünk részt: EI-reg és V-reg. Két részfeladat esetében az idegi komponensek különböző kombinációit vizsgáljuk. Az EI-reg esetében rendszerünk a Pearson korrelációs együtthatóban 0,727 pontosságot ér el (minden esetben), a Pearson korrelációs együtthatóban 0,555 pontosságot (0,5-1). V-reg esetében az elért pontossági pontszámok 0,835, illetve 0,670', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα που ανταγωνίστηκε στο έργο 1: "Επίδραση στα tweets". Το σύστημά μας χρησιμοποιεί μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική μέθοδο συνόλου που συνδυάζει διάφορα στοιχεία νευρικού δικτύου. Συμμετέχουμε σε δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες για Αγγλικά tweets: EI-reg και V-reg. Για δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες εξετάζονται διαφορετικοί συνδυασμοί νευρωνικών συστατικών. Για το σύστημα επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 0.727 στον συντελεστή συσχέτισης Pearson (όλες οι περιπτώσεις) και ακρίβεια 0.555 στον συντελεστή συσχέτισης Pearson (0.5-1). Για το V-reg, τα επιτευχθέντα αποτελέσματα ακρίβειας είναι αντίστοιχα 0.835 και 0.670', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente mes pasiūlėme sistemą, kuri konkuravo pirmojoje užduotyje "Poveikis Tweetuose". Mūsų sistema naudoja paprastą, bet veiksmingą komplekso metodą, kuriame sujungiami keli neurologinio tinklo komponentai. We participate in two subtasks for English tweets: EI-reg and V-reg.  Dviejų paklausimų atveju tiriami skirtingi nervinių komponentų deriniai. EI-reg atveju mūsų sistema užtikrina 0,727 tikslumą Pearson koreliacijos koeficiente (visais atvejais) ir 0,555 tikslumą Pearson koreliacijos koeficiente (0,5–1). For V-reg, the achieved accuracy scores are respectively 0.835 and 0.670', 'it': "In questo articolo, abbiamo presentato un sistema che ha partecipato al SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. Il nostro sistema utilizza un metodo di ensemble semplice ma efficace che combina diversi componenti della rete neurale. Partecipiamo a due sottoattività per tweet in inglese: EI-reg e V-reg. Per due sottoattività, vengono esaminate diverse combinazioni di componenti neurali. Per EI-reg, il nostro sistema raggiunge una precisione di 0,727 in Coefficiente di Correlazione Pearson (tutte le istanze) e una precisione di 0,555 in Coefficiente di Correlazione Pearson (0,5-1). Per V-reg, i punteggi di precisione raggiunti sono rispettivamente 0,835 e 0,670", 'mk': 'Во овој весник предложивме систем кој се натпреваруваше на SemEval-2018 Task 1: „Affect in Tweets“. Нашиот систем користи едноставен, но ефикасен ансембл метод кој комбинира неколку нервни мрежни компоненти. Ние учествуваме во две потпрашања за англиски твитови: EI-reg и V-reg. За две потпрашања се испитуваат различни комбинации на нервни компоненти. За Ел-рег, нашиот систем постигнува точност од 0,727 во Коефициентот за корелација на Пирсон (сите случаи) и точност од 0,555 во Коефициентот за корелација на Пирсон (0,5-1). За V-reg постигнатите точности се 0,835 и 0,670', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз бірінші тапсырма "Твиттерде әсер ететін" жүйесін жасадық. Біздің жүйеміз бірнеше неврал желінің компоненттерін біріктіретін қарапайым, бірақ эффективті енсембул әдісін қолданады. Біз ағылшынша tweets үшін екі субсұраныста: EI-reg және V-reg. Екі ішкі сұрақ үшін невралдық компоненттердің түрлі комбинациялары тексеріледі. EI-reg үшін, біздің жүйеміз Пирсондың коэфициенті (барлық случаттар) түзету коэфициентінде 0,727 және Пирсондың коэфициенті (0,5-1) түзету коэфициентінде 0,555 дұрыстығын жеткізеді. V- reg үшін жеткізген дұрыс сандары 0, 835 мен 0, 670', 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kami melanjutkan sistem yang bersaing di SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. Sistem kita menggunakan kaedah ensemble sederhana tetapi efektif yang menggabungkan beberapa komponen rangkaian saraf. Kami berpartisipasi dalam dua sub-tanya untuk tweet Inggeris: EI-reg dan V-reg. Untuk dua sub-tanya, kombinasi berbeza komponen saraf diperiksa. Untuk EI-reg, sistem kita mencapai ketepatan 0.727 dalam Pearson Correlation Coefficient (semua kes) dan ketepatan 0.555 dalam Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0.5-1). Untuk V-reg, skor ketepatan yang dicapai adalah 0.835 dan 0.670.", 'mt': "F'dan id-dokument ippreżentajna sistema li kompliet f'SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affett in Tweets'. Is-sistema tagħna tuża metodu ta’ ensemble sempliċi iżda effettiv li jgħaqqad diversi komponenti tan-netwerk newrali. Aħna qed jipparteċipaw f’żewġ sottotalbiet għal tweets bl-Ingliż: EI-reg u V-reg. Għal żewġ sottomistoqsijiet, huma eżaminati kombinazzjonijiet differenti ta’ komponenti newrali. Għall-EI-reg, is-sistema tagħna tikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 0.727 fil-Koeffiċjent tal-Korelazzjoni ta’ Pearson (kull każ) u preċiżjoni ta’ 0.555 fil-Koeffiċjent tal-Korelazzjoni ta’ Pearson (0.5-1). Għal V-reg, il-punteġġi ta’ preċiżjoni miksuba huma rispettivament 0.835 u 0.670", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2018 Task 1-д өрсөлдөг системийг тавьсан. Бидний систем олон мэдрэлийн сүлжээний компонентүүдийг нэгтгэдэг энгийн ч үр дүнтэй эмзэг арга ашигладаг. Бид Англи хэлний tweets дээр хоёр сурагчид оролцож байна: EI-reg, V-reg. Хоёр суурь дотор мэдрэлийн компонентүүдийн цуглуулалтыг шалгана. EI-reg-ийн хувьд бидний систем Персон зөвшөөрүүлэлтийн коэффициент дээр 0.727 тохиромжтой байдаг. Персон зөвшөөрүүлэлтийн коэффициент дээр 0.555 тохиромжтой тохиромжтой байдаг. V-reg-ийн хувьд амжилттай зөв тоо нь 0.835, 0.670.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടി വെച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1-ല്\u200d മത്സരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിസ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഒരു എളുപ്പമുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രാപ്തികമാ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി രണ്ടു സബ്ട്ടാജുകളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു: ഇ-റെഗും വി-റ രണ്ടു സബ്ട്ടേജുകള്\u200dക്ക്, വ്യത്യസ്ത കൂട്ടുകങ്ങള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഘടകങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. EI-reg എന്നിട്ട് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് പെയ്സണ്\u200d കോര്\u200dബന്ധത്തിന്റെ കോഫിസെന്\u200dറിന്\u200dറെ (എല്ലാ സാഹചര്യങ്ങളും) 0. 727 ന്റെയും കൃത്യമാണ് ലഭിക്കുന്നത്. പീര്\u200d വി-റിഗിന് വേണ്ടി, സമ്പാദിച്ച സ്കോര്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നത് 0. 835, 0. 670', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiliśmy system konkurujący podczas SemEval-2018 Task 1: "Affect in Tweets". Nasz system wykorzystuje prostą, ale skuteczną metodę zespołu, która łączy kilka komponentów sieci neuronowej. Uczestniczymy w dwóch podzadaniach dla angielskich tweetów: EI-reg i V-reg. Dla dwóch podzadań badane są różne kombinacje składników neuronowych. W przypadku EI-reg nasz system osiąga dokładność 0.727 we współczynniku korelacji Pearsona (wszystkie przypadki) i dokładność 0.555 we współczynniku korelacji Pearsona (0.5-1). W przypadku V-reg osiągnięte wyniki dokładności wynoszą odpowiednio 0.835 i 0.670', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, am prezentat un sistem care a concurat la SemEval-2018 Task 1: "Afect in Tweets". Sistemul nostru folosește o metodă simplă, dar eficientă de ansamblu, care combină mai multe componente ale rețelei neurale. Participăm la două subactivități pentru tweeturile în limba engleză: EI-reg și V-reg. Pentru două subactivități, sunt examinate combinații diferite de componente neurale. Pentru EI-reg, sistemul nostru atinge o precizie de 0,727 în coeficientul de corelație Pearson (toate instanțele) și o precizie de 0,555 în coeficientul de corelație Pearson (0,5-1). Pentru V-reg, scorurile de precizie obținute sunt de 0,835 și respectiv 0,670', 'no': 'I denne papiret sett vi fram eit system som konkurerte på halvEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Etter tweets. Systemet vårt bruker ein enkel, men effektiv ensemblemmetode som kombinerer fleire neuralnettverkskomponentar. Vi deltar i to underspørsmål for engelske tweets: EI-reg og V-reg. For to underspørsmål vert forskjellige kombinasjonar av neiralkomponentar undersøkt. For EI-reg er systemet vårt nøyaktig 0,727 i Pearson Correlation Coefficient (alle tilfelle) og eit nøyaktig 0,555 i Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0,5-1). For V-reg, oppnådd nøyaktighetspoeng er 0,835 og 0,670 respectively', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru smo predstavili sistem koji se natjeèe na zadatku 1. na semiEval-2018: "Poslužuje Tweets". Naš sistem koristi jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu ensemble koja kombinira nekoliko komponenta neuralne mreže. Učestvujemo u dve podrške za engleske tweets: EI-reg i V-reg. Za dve podatke, pregledavaju različite kombinacije neuralnih komponenta. Za EI-reg, naš sistem postiže tačnost od 0,727 u koeficijentom korištenja Pearsona (svih slučajeva) i tačnost od 0,555 u koeficijentom korištenja Pearsona (0,5-1). Za V-reg, postignuti rezultati tačnosti su odgovarajući 0,835 i 0,670', 'si': "මේ පැත්තට, අපි පද්ධතියක් දාලා තියෙන්නේ සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩේ 1 ක්\u200dරියාවේ: 'ට්විට් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න'. අපේ පද්ධතිය පාවිච්චි කරන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය නමුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් නි අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් එක ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා: EI-reg සහ V-reg. වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකට, න්\u200dයූරල් කොන්දේන්ටර් එක්කම් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. EI-reg වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ පද්ධතිය පර්සන් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්පූර්ණත්වයෙන් 0.727 වල සිද්ධතාවක් සහ පර්සන් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්පූර්ණත්වයෙන් 0.555 වල V-reg වෙනුවෙන්, සම්පූර්ණත්වය අංක 0.835 සහ 0.700", 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ku qornay nidaam ka tartanka SemEval-2018 shaqo 1: "Saamayn ku saabsan Tweets". nidaamkayagu wuxuu isticmaalaa qaab fudud oo weli faa’iido leh, kaas oo isku daryeela qeybo badan oo shabakadda neuro\'yada ah. Waxaynu ka qeybqaadannaa laba shabakad ee Tweetka Ingiriiska: EI-reg iyo V-reg. Waxaa lagu baarayaa labada shuqul oo kala duduwan kooxaha neurada. Waayo, EI-reg, nidaamkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa saxda 0.727 ee Pearson Correlation Coefficient (dhamaan dhacdooyinka) iyo saxda 0.555 ee Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0.5-1). For V-reg, scoraha saxda la gaadhay waxay u yihiin qiyaas 0.835 iyo 0.670', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterade vi ett system som tävlade på SemEval-2018 Task 1: "Påverkan i tweets". Vårt system använder en enkel men effektiv ensemblemetod som kombinerar flera neurala nätverkskomponenter. Vi deltar i två underuppgifter för engelska tweets: EI-reg och V-reg. För två underuppgifter undersöks olika kombinationer av neurala komponenter. För EI-reg uppnår vårt system en noggrannhet på 0,727 i Pearson korrelationskoefficient (alla instanser) och en noggrannhet på 0,555 i Pearson korrelationskoefficient (0,5-1). För V-reg är de uppnådda noggrannhetspoängen 0,835 respektive 0,670', 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் செம்வால்-2018 பணியில் எதிர்பார்த்த ஒரு அமைப்பை முன்னோக்கி வைத்தோம் 'Tweets' விளைவு. எங்கள் கணினியின் சுலபமான இன்னும் பயன்படுத்தும் ஒரு முறையை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, அது பல புதிய புதிய பிணைய பிணையத்த ஆங்கிலத்தில் இரு துணை பணிகளுக்கு நாம் பங்கிடுகிறோம்: EI-reg மற்றும் V-reg. இரண்டு துணை பணிகளுக்கு, வேறு புதிய பொருளின் இணைப்புகள் பரிசோதிக்கப்படுகிறது. For EI-reg, our system achieves an accuracy of 0.727 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (all instances) and an accuracy of 0.555 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0.5-1).  V- reg க்கு, தெரிந்த சரியான மதிப்பெண்கள் குறிப்பிட்ட 0. 835 மற்றும் 0. 670", 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک سیسٹم کو آگے بھیجا جو SemEval-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں مسابقه کرتی تھی: Tweets میں اثر اثر اثر ہے۔ ہمارا سیستم ایک ساده اور اثبات اینسمبل طریقہ استعمال کرتا ہے جو بہت سی نیورل نیٹ ورک رقم جمع کرتا ہے۔ ہم انگلیسی ٹویٹ کے لئے دو سپٹسٹ میں شریک ہوتے ہیں: EI-reg اور V-reg. دو دفعہ کے لئے مختلف نئورل قسمتوں کی ترکیب کی آزمائش کی جاتی ہے. EI-reg کے لئے، ہماری سیسٹم پیرسون Correlation Coefficient میں 0.727 کی دقیق پہنچتی ہے اور پیرسون Correlation Coefficient میں 0.555 کی دقیق پہنچتی ہے (0.5-1)۔ V-reg کے لئے پہنچ گئے دقیق اسکور 0.835 اور 0.670 ہیں', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz SemEval-2018 Vazifani 1 vazifa bilan rivojlanadigan tizimni ‘ Twitterda muammoga’ tugatamiz. Bizning tizimimiz bir necha neyrol tarmoq komponentlarini birlashtirish uchun oddiy va effektiv foydalanadi. Biz ingliz Twitter uchun ikkita sub-vazifalarga qaytamiz: EI-reg va V-reg. For two subtasks, different combinations of neural components are examined.  EI-reg uchun bizning tizimmiz Pearson Correlation Coefficienci 0.727 ta'tibor beradi (hamma usullar) va Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0.5-1) davomida 0.555 ta'minligini aniqlaydi. V-reg bo'lgan tasdiqlar qiymatlari o'rtasida 0.835 va 0.670", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một hệ thống cạnh tranh tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvol 1: "Xác nhận trong Tweet". Hệ thống của chúng tôi sử dụng một phương pháp kết hợp đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả, kết hợp nhiều thành phần mạng thần kinh. Chúng tôi tham gia vào hai phần nhỏ tiếng Anh: Ei-Reg và V-Reg. Đối với hai phụ đề, các kết hợp thần kinh khác nhau được kiểm tra. Với Ei-Reg, hệ thống của chúng ta đạt được độ chính xác 0.727 ở Pearson Correctional coefficient (all cases) and an accuracy of 0.55 in Pierson Correctional coent (0.5-1). V ới V-Reg, điểm chính xác đã đạt được là 0.835 và 0.670', 'hr': "U ovom papiru smo predstavili sustav koji se natječeo na zadatku 1. na semiEval-2018: 'utjecaj na Tweets'. Naš sustav koristi jednostavnu, ali učinkovitu metodu ensemble koja kombinira nekoliko komponenta neuralne mreže. Učestvujemo u dvije podrške za engleske tweets: EI-reg i V-reg. Za dvije podatke ispitivaju se različite kombinacije nervnih komponenta. Za EI-reg, naš sustav postiže točnost od 0,727 u koeficijenciji korištenja Pearsona (svih slučajeva) i točnost od 0,555 u koeficijenciji korištenja Pearsona (0,5-1). Za V-reg postignuti rezultati točnosti su odgovarajući 0,835 i 0,670", 'bg': 'В тази статия представихме система, която се състезаваше на задача 1: "Въздействие в туитове". Нашата система използва прост, но ефективен ансамбъл метод, който съчетава няколко компонента на невронната мрежа. Участваме в две подзадачи за английски туитове: Ей-рег и В-рег. За две подзадачи се изследват различни комбинации от невронни компоненти. За нашата система постига точност от 0,727 по коефициент на корелация на Пиърсън (всички случаи) и точност от 0,555 по коефициент на корелация на Пиърсън (0,5-1). За V- рег постигнатите резултати за точност са съответно 0, 835 и 0, 670', 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kami mengajukan sistem yang berkompetisi di SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. Sistem kita menggunakan metode ensemble sederhana namun efektif yang menggabungkan beberapa komponen jaringan saraf. Kami berpartisipasi dalam dua subtasks untuk tweet Inggris: EI-reg dan V-reg. Untuk dua subtasks, kombinasi yang berbeda dari komponen saraf diperiksa. For EI-reg, our system achieves an accuracy of 0.727 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (all instances) and an accuracy of 0.555 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0.5-1).  Untuk V-reg, skor akurasi yang dicapai adalah 0,835 dan 0,670", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein System vor, das bei SemEval-2018 Task 1 konkurriert: "Affect in Tweets". Unser System verwendet eine einfache, aber effektive Ensemblemethode, die mehrere neuronale Netzwerkkomponenten kombiniert. Wir nehmen an zwei Teilaufgaben für englische Tweets teil: EI-reg und V-reg. Für zwei Teilaufgaben werden unterschiedliche Kombinationen neuronaler Komponenten untersucht. Für EI-reg erreicht unser System eine Genauigkeit von 0,727 im Pearson-Korrelationskoeffizienten (alle Instanzen) und eine Genauigkeit von 0,555 im Pearson-Korrelationskoeffizienten (0,5-1). Für V-reg sind die erreichten Genauigkeitswerte jeweils 0,835 und 0,670', 'nl': "In dit artikel stellen we een systeem voor dat concurreerde bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. Ons systeem maakt gebruik van een eenvoudige maar effectieve ensemblemethode die verschillende neurale netwerkcomponenten combineert. We nemen deel aan twee subtaken voor Engelse tweets: EI-reg en V-reg. Voor twee subtaken worden verschillende combinaties van neurale componenten onderzocht. Voor EI-reg bereikt ons systeem een nauwkeurigheid van 0.727 in Pearson Correlatie Cofficiënt (alle gevallen) en een nauwkeurigheid van 0.555 in Pearson Correlatie Cofficiënt (0.5-1). Voor V-reg zijn de bereikte nauwkeurigheidsscores respectievelijk 0.835 en 0.670", 'da': "I denne artikel fremlagde vi et system, der konkurrerede ved SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Påvirkning i tweets'. Vores system bruger en enkel, men effektiv ensemble metode, der kombinerer flere neurale netværkskomponenter. Vi deltager i to underopgaver til engelske tweets: EI-reg og V-reg. For to underopgaver undersøges forskellige kombinationer af neurale komponenter. For EI-reg opnår vores system en nøjagtighed på 0,727 i Pearson korrelationskoefficient (alle forekomster) og en nøjagtighed på 0,555 i Pearson korrelationskoefficient (0,5-1). For V-reg er de opnåede nøjagtighedsgrader henholdsvis 0,835 og 0,670", 'ko': "본고에서 우리는SemEval-18퀘스트1'트위터의 영향'에서 경쟁하는 시스템을 제시했다.우리 시스템은 몇 개의 신경 네트워크 구성 요소를 결합시키는 간단하고 효과적인 집적 방법을 사용했다.우리는 영어 트윗의 두 가지 임무인 EI reg과 V-reg에 참여한다.두 개의 하위 임무에 대해 신경 부품의 다른 조합을 검사할 것이다.EI reg의 경우 Pearson 상관관계수(모든 인스턴스)와 Pearson 상관관계수(0.5-1)의 정밀도는 각각 0.727과 0.555에 달했다.V-reg에 대한 정확도 점수는 각각 0.835와 0.670이다", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, SemEval-2018 Görevi 1'de ýaryşylan sistemi saýladyk, Tweets'de etkileşik bar. Biziň sistemimiz birnäçe näyral şebeke komponentlerini birleştirilýän basit we täsirli bir şekilde ulanýar. Biz Iňlisçe tweets üçin iki subtaskda goşulýarys: EI-reg we V-reg. Iki esasy üçin, näyral komponentleriň üýtgeşmeleri çalyşyrylýar. EI-reg üçin biziň sistemamyz Pearson Correlation Koefisyýaty (hemme ýagdaýynda) 0.727-yň dogrylygyny we Pearson Correlation Koefisyýaty (0.5-1) dogrylygyny ýetip barýar. V-reg üçin tapylýan dogry sanlary 0.835 we 0.670", 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunaweka mfumo uliokutana katika kazi ya SemEval-2018: “Inaathiri kwenye twita”. Mfumo wetu unatumia njia rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi inayounganisha vifaa kadhaa vya mtandao wa neura. Tunashiriki kazi mbili kwa twiti za Kiingereza: EI-reg na V-reg. For two subtasks, different combinations of neural components are examined.  For EI-reg, our system achieves an accuracy of 0.727 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (all instances) and an accuracy of 0.555 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0.5-1).  Kwa V-reg, score zilizofanikiwa ni kwa asilimia 0.835 na 0.670', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، یک سیستم را پیش فرستادیم که در ماموریت ۱ نیم Eval-2018 رقابت کرد: اثر توئیت است. سیستم ما از روش ساده و تاثیری که چند بخش شبکه عصبی را ترکیب می کند استفاده می کند. ما در دو زیر سوال برای tweets انگلیسی شرکت می کنیم: EI-reg و V-reg. برای دو زیر پاسخ، ترکیب\u200cهای مختلف از بخش\u200cهای عصبی تحقیق می\u200cشوند. برای EI-reg، سیستم ما دقیق 0.727 در تعداد کوتاهی کوتاهی Pearson و دقیق 0.555 در تعداد کوتاهی کوتاهی Pearson (0.5-1) رسیده است. برای V-reg، امتیاز دقیقیت موفق شده به طور مختلف 0.835 و 0.670 هستند', 'af': "In hierdie papier het ons 'n stelsel voort gestel wat by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1 gemeenskap het: 'Afteken in Tweets'. Ons stelsel gebruik 'n eenvoudig nog effektief ensembleem metode wat verskeie neuralnetwerk komponente kombinieer. Ons deel in twee subtaske vir Engels tweets: EI-reg en V-reg. Vir twee subtaske word verskillende kombinasies van neurale komponente ondersoek. Vir EI-reg, ons stelsel bereik 'n presisie van 0,727 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (alle geval) en 'n presisie van 0,555 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0,5-1). Vir V- reg, die berekende presisiteitstelling is respektief 0. 835 en 0. 670", 'az': "Bu kağızda, SemEval-2018 Task 1'də müharibə edən bir sistemi təyin etdik. Sistemimiz bir neçə nöral a ğ komponentlərini birləşdirən basit, amma etkili ensemble metodlarını kullanır. Biz İngilis tweets üçün iki subtasklara katılırıq: EI-reg və V-reg. İki dəstək üçün, nöral komponentlərin müxtəlif kombinatsiyaları sınağa çəkilir. EI-reg üçün Sistemimiz Pearson Correlation Coefficient (bütün məsələlər) və Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0,5-1) arasında 0,555 dəqiqliyinə nail olur. V-reg üçün tapılmış nöqtələr müqayisədə 0,835 və 0,670", 'hy': '员盏战 诈詹诈斋 沾榨栈 沾榨斩謩 沾斋 瞻铡沾铡寨铡謤眨 铡占铡栈铡謤寨榨謥斋斩謩, 崭謤炸 沾謤謥铡寨謥榨謥 2018 诈站铡寨铡斩斋 諐榨沾缘站铡宅 铡占铡栈斋斩 瞻铡斩毡斩铡謤铡謤崭謧沾諠 "员辗窄铡湛榨宅 怨站斋诈榨謤崭謧沾": 談榨謤 瞻铡沾铡寨铡謤眨炸 謪眨湛铡眨崭謤债崭謧沾 乍 蘸铡謤咋, 闸铡盏謥 铡謤栅盏崭謧斩铡站榨湛 瞻铡沾铡寨铡謤眨展铡盏斋斩 沾榨诈崭栅, 崭謤炸 瞻铡沾铡栅謤崭謧沾 乍 沾斋 謩铡斩斋 斩盏铡謤栅铡盏斋斩 謥铡斩謥斋 闸铡詹铡栅謤斋展斩榨謤: 談榨斩謩 沾铡战斩铡寨謥崭謧沾 榨斩謩 铡斩眨宅榨謤榨斩 诈站斋诈榨謤斋 榨謤寨崭謧 榨斩诈铡瞻铡謤謥榨謤斋斩諠 苑宅-諏榨眨 謬 諑-諏榨眨: 缘謤寨崭謧 榨斩诈铡瞻铡謤謥崭謧沾 斩盏铡謤栅铡盏斋斩 闸铡詹铡栅謤斋展斩榨謤斋 湛铡謤闸榨謤 瞻铡沾铡栅謤崭謧诈盏崭謧斩斩榨謤炸 崭謧战崭謧沾斩铡战斋謤崭謧沾 榨斩: 苑宅-諏榨眨-斋 栅榨蘸謩崭謧沾 沾榨謤 瞻铡沾铡寨铡謤眨炸 瞻铡战斩崭謧沾 乍 0.727 粘辗眨謤湛崭謧诈盏铡斩炸 諍斋謤战崭斩 钥崭謤榨宅榨謤铡謥斋铡盏斋 钥崭謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏謫榨盏 諑-占榨眨-斋 栅榨蘸謩崭謧沾 战湛铡謥站铡债 粘辗眨謤湛崭謧诈盏铡斩 眨斩铡瞻铡湛铡寨铡斩斩榨謤炸 0.835 謬 0.670 榨斩:', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru smo predstavili sistem koji se natjecava na zadatku 1. na semiEval-2018: Afekt na Tweets. Naš sistem koristi jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu ensemble koja kombinira nekoliko komponenta neuromreže. Učestvujemo u dvije podrške za engleske tweets: EI-reg i V-reg. Za dvije podatke se pregledavaju različite kombinacije neuralnih komponenta. Za EI-reg, naš sistem postiže tačnost od 0,727 u koeficijenti korištenja Pearsona (svih slučajeva) i tačnost od 0,555 u koeficijenti korištenja Pearsona (0,5-1). Za V-reg, postignuti rezultati tačnosti su odgovarajući 0,835 i 0,670', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সিস্টেম প্রদান করেছি যা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১-এ প্রতিযোগিতা করেছে “টুইটারে প্রভাব ফেলেছে”। Our system uses a simple yet effective ensemble method which combines several neural network components.  ইংরেজী টুইটের জন্য আমরা দুটি সাবট্যাকাজে অংশগ্রহণ করি: ইআই-রেগ এবং ভি-রেগ। দুটি সাবটাসের জন্য নিউরেল কম্পোনেন্ট পরীক্ষা করা হচ্ছে। ইআই-রিগের জন্য, আমাদের সিস্টেম পেয়ারসন কোর্যান্টেন্ট কফিসেন্টের (সকল ঘটনা) সম্পর্কের সঠিকভাবে ০. 727 পেয়েছে এবং পেয়ারসন কোর্যান্টেন্ট কফিসেন্ট (0 ভি-রেগের জন্য, অর্জনের সঠিক স্কোর পরিমাণ ০. ৮৩৫ এবং ০. ৬৭০', 'ca': "En aquest article vam presentar un sistema que va competir a SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. El nostre sistema utilitza un mètode d'ensemble simple però efectiu que combina diversos components de xarxa neural. Participem en dues subtaskes per tweets anglesos: EI-reg i V-reg. For two subtasks, different combinations of neural components are examined.  For EI-reg, our system achieves an accuracy of 0.727 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (all instances) and an accuracy of 0.555 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0.5-1).  For V-reg, the achieved accuracy scores are respectively 0.835 and 0.670", 'cs': "V tomto článku jsme představili systém, který soutěžil na SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. Náš systém využívá jednoduchou, ale efektivní metodu souboru, která kombinuje několik složek neuronové sítě. Účastníme se dvou podúkolů pro anglické tweety: EI-reg a V-reg. U dvou dílčích úkolů jsou zkoumány různé kombinace nervových složek. Pro EI-reg dosahuje náš systém přesnosti 0,727 v Pearsonově korelačním koeficientu (všechny instance) a přesnosti 0,555 v Pearsonově korelačním koeficientu (0,5-1). U V-reg jsou dosažené skóre přesnosti 0,835 a 0,670", 'sq': "Në këtë letër, ne paraqitëm një sistem që konkurroi në SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. Sistemi ynë përdor një metodë të thjeshtë por të efektshme që kombinon disa komponente të rrjetit nervor. Ne marrim pjesë në dy nënkërkesa për tweetet angleze: EI-reg dhe V-reg. Për dy nënpyetje, janë shqyrtuar kombinime të ndryshme të komponenteve nervore. Për EI-reg, sistemi ynë arrin një saktësi prej 0.727 në Koeficientin e Korelacionit të Pearsonit (të gjitha rastet) dhe një saktësi prej 0.555 në Koeficientin e Korelacionit të Pearsonit (0.5-1). Për V-reg, rezultatet e arritura të saktësisë janë respektivisht 0.835 dhe 0.670", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የሳምEval-2018 ስራ 1 “በትዊተሮች ላይ ተግባር” የሚቻለውን ድምፅ አቆይተናል፡፡ ስብስነታችን ግን የሚጠያየቅ ጥያቄ ሆኖ የሚጠቅመው የደዌብ መረብ ክፍተቶችን የሚያሳስብ ቀላል ነው፡፡ እንግሊዘኛ በትዊተሮች ላይ ሁለት ደብዳቤዎችን እና ቪ-reg እናጋራለን፡፡ ለሁለት ደብዳቤዎች፣ ልዩ ልዩ የናውሬት ሰብነቶች ይሞክራሉ፡፡ ለEI-reg፣ ስርዓታችን የፓርሶን ኮርማቲ አካባቢነት (ሁለንተናዎች) የ0.727 እርግጠኛ አግኝቷል፡፡ ለV-reg የተደረገው እርግጠኛ ነጥብ በቁጥር 0.835 እና 0.670 ናቸው', 'et': 'Selles dokumendis esitasime süsteemi, mis konkureeris SemEval-2018 ülesandel 1: "Mõju tweetides". Meie süsteem kasutab lihtsat, kuid tõhusat ansambli meetodit, mis ühendab mitmeid närvivõrgu komponente. Osaleme kahes alamülesandes inglise keeles tweets: EI-reg ja V-reg. Kahe alamülesande puhul uuritakse erinevaid neurokomponentide kombinatsioone. EI-reg puhul saavutab meie süsteem täpsuse 0,727 Pearsoni korrelatsioonikoefitsiendis (kõik juhtumid) ja täpsuse 0,555 Pearsoni korrelatsioonikoefitsiendis (0,5-1). V-reg puhul on saavutatud täpsuse skoorid vastavalt 0,835 ja 0,670', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitimme järjestelmän, joka kilpaili SemEval-2018 Task 1: "Affect in Tweets". Järjestelmämme käyttää yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta ensemble-menetelmää, jossa yhdistyvät useita neuroverkon komponentteja. Osallistumme kahteen englanninkielisten twiittien alatehtävään: EI-reg ja V-reg. Kahdessa alatehtävässä tutkitaan eri hermokomponenttien yhdistelmiä. EI-reg:n osalta järjestelmämme saavuttaa tarkkuuden 0,727 Pearsonin korrelaatiokertoimella (kaikissa tapauksissa) ja tarkkuuden 0,555 Pearsonin korrelaatiokertoimella (0,5-1). V-reg:ssä saavutetut tarkkuuspisteet ovat vastaavasti 0,835 ja 0,670', 'jv': 'Nan pepulan iki, kita mulai sistem sing wis arep mlayu nang semebal-2013 task 1: AfEffect in Two. Sistem-sistem iki sistem sistem sistem sistem semplin y akeh efsan arka sampeyan karo akeh sampeyan tambah alat kompon. Awak dhéwé menyang pisan nganggo dolanan sing dibutuluh kanggo tuwit Inggris: E I-Reg lan V-Reg. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Daftar E-Reg, sistem dhéwé iso dianggap 0.247 barêng, dadi coeffisit (gak sing dirangkat) lan 0.fm berlanjut caffeksit (0.5-1). Terus V-Reg, dadi sing paling dadi angat 0.8 lan 0.6', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku smo predstavili sistem, ki je tekmoval na nalogi 1 SemEval-2018: "Vpliv v tweets". Naš sistem uporablja preprosto, vendar učinkovito ansamble metodo, ki združuje več komponent nevronskega omrežja. Sodelujemo pri dveh podnalogah za angleške tweete: EI-reg in V-reg. Za dve podnalogi se preučijo različne kombinacije nevronskih komponent. Za EI-reg naš sistem doseže natančnost 0,727 v Pearsonovem korelacijskem koeficientu (vsi primeri) in natančnost 0,555 v Pearsonovem korelacijskem koeficientu (0,5-1). Pri V-reg je dosežena točnostna ocena 0,835 oziroma 0,670', 'ha': 'Ga wannan takardan, za\'a gabatar da wani na\'urar da ke yin gaugawa a shemeval-2018 Tafiyar da "Mai Gayya a cikin Twitter". @ info: whatsthis Tuna raba cikin aikin biyu na Ingiriya: EI-reg da V-reg. An jarraba komai biyu cikin ƙanshin aikin neura. For EI-reg, our system achieves an accuracy of 0.727 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (all instances) and an accuracy of 0.555 in Pearson Correlation Coefficient (0.5-1).  @ info: whatsthis', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དུས་ལྟར་SemEval-2018 ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཕར་ཆེན་བྱེད་པའི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་tweets(EI-reg)དང་། V-reg(V-reg)ལ་subtasks གཉིས་ནང་དུ་ཞུགས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དུས་མཐུན་ཆ་ཤས་ཀྱི་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་ཚར་མི་འདྲ་ཞིབ་བྱེད། EI-reg ཡིན་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་Pearson Correlation Coefficient(all instances)ནང་ཚད་0.727ཡིས་བདེ་འཇལ་རྒྱུ་དང་། Pearson Correlation Coefficient(0.5-1)ལ་བདེ་འཇལ་རྒྱུ་ཡིན། V-reg་ལ་ཐོབ་པའི་དྲན་ཚད་གྲངས་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། 0.835 དང 0.670', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, הצענו מערכת שמתחררה ב"SemEval-2018 Task 1: "Affect in Tweets". המערכת שלנו משתמשת בשיטת אסמבל פשוטה אך יעילה שמשולבת מספר רכיבי רשת עצביים. אנחנו משתתפים בשני תחתונות לטוויטים אנגליים: EI-reg ו-V-reg. עבור שתי תחתונות, שילובים שונים של רכיבים עצביים נבדקים. עבור EI-reg, המערכת שלנו משיגה מדויקה של 0.727 ב Coefficient Correlation פירסון (כל מקרים) ו מדויקה של 0.555 ב Coefficient Correlation פירסון (0.5-1). עבור V-reg, נקודות הדיוקנות השיגות הן 0.835 ו-0.670'}
{'en': 'LT3 at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : A classifier chain to detect emotions in tweets', 'ar': 'LT3 في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: سلسلة تصنيف لاكتشاف المشاعر في التغريدات', 'es': 'LT3 en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Una cadena clasificadora para detectar emociones en los tuits', 'fr': 'LT3 au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Une chaîne de classificateurs pour détecter les émotions dans les tweets', 'pt': 'LT3 na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Uma cadeia de classificadores para detectar emoções em tweets', 'zh': 'LT3 at SemEval-2018 务 1:以检情类器链', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のLT 3タスク1 ：ツイート内の感情を検出するための分類チェーン', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर LT3: tweets में भावनाओं का पता लगाने के लिए एक क्लासिफायर श्रृंखला', 'ru': 'LT3 на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Цепочка классификаторов для обнаружения эмоций в твитах', 'ga': 'LT3 ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Slabhra aicmitheora chun mothúcháin a bhrath i dtvuíteanna', 'hu': 'LT3 a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Egy osztályozólánc az érzelmek felismerésére a tweetekben', 'ka': 'LT3 SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 1: კლასიფიკაციური წერტილი, რომელიც ემოციების განახსნა', 'el': 'Καθήκον 1: Μια αλυσίδα ταξινομητών για την ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων στα tweets', 'lt': 'LT3 SemEval-2018 1 užduotis: klasifikavimo grandinė, skirta nustatyti emocijas tweetuose', 'it': 'LT3 a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Una catena di classificatori per rilevare le emozioni nei tweet', 'kk': 'LT3 жалпы-2018 тапсырмасы 1: Твиттерде емоцияларды табу үшін классификациялық тізбегі', 'ms': 'LT3 di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Rangkaian klasifikasi untuk mengesan emosi dalam tweet', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ LT3: ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d ചങ്ങല്\u200d', 'mt': 'LT3 f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Katina ta’ klassifikazzjoni biex jiġu identifikati emozzjonijiet fit-tweets', 'mk': 'LT3 на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Класификациски ланец за детектирање на емоции на твитови', 'no': 'LT3 på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Eit klassifiserer kjede for å oppdaga emosjonar i tweets', 'mn': 'LT3-г SemEval-2018 Task 1: Твитт дээр сэтгэл хөдлөлийг олохын тулд', 'pl': 'LT3 w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Łańcuch klasyfikacyjny do wykrywania emocji w tweetach', 'ro': 'LT3 la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Un lanț de clasificare pentru a detecta emoțiile în tweet-uri', 'so': 'LT3 Shaqada SemEval-2018', 'sr': 'LT3 na semiEval-2018 Task 1: klasifikatorni lanac za otkrivanje emocija u tweetima', 'si': 'LT3 at semeval-2018 Job 1: A classifier chain to find emoticons in tweets', 'sv': 'LT3 på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: En klassificeringskedja för att upptäcka känslor i tweets', 'ur': 'LT3 ٹویٹ میں احساسات شناسایی کرنے کے لئے ایک کلاسپیر زنجیر', 'ta': 'செம்Eval-2018ல் LT3 பணி 1: தொடர்களில் உணர்வுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு வகுப்பான சங்கிலி', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'L3 trong Nhiệm vụ SemEvol 1: một chuỗi phân loại để phát hiện cảm xúc trên Twitter', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Класификационна верига за откриване на емоции в туитове', 'hr': 'LT3 na semiEval-2018 Task 1: klasifikacijski lanac za otkrivanje emocija u tweetima', 'nl': 'LT3 op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Een classificatieketen om emoties in tweets te detecteren', 'id': 'LT3 di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Rantai klasifikasi untuk mendeteksi emosi dalam tweet', 'de': 'LT3 bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Eine Klassifikatorkette zur Erkennung von Emotionen in Tweets', 'ko': 'LT3 SemEval-18 퀘스트 1: 트윗의 정서를 측정하는 분류기 체인', 'fa': 'LT3 در ماموریت ۱: یک زنجیر محرمانه برای شناسایی احساسات در توئیت', 'da': 'LT3 på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: En klassificeringskæde til at opdage følelser i tweets', 'sw': 'LT3 kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Mfungo wa kutambua hisia katika twiti', 'tr': 'LT3 at SemEval-2018 Task 1: A classifier chain to detect emotions in tweets', 'sq': 'LT3 në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Një zinxhir klasifikues për të zbuluar emocionet në tweet', 'af': "LT3 by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: ' n klassifiseerder ketting om emosies in tweets te ontdek", 'am': 'ስራ', 'hy': 'LT3-ը ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի առաջին հանձնարարությունում. Թվիթերում զգացմունքներ հայտնաբերելու դասակարգչային շղթա', 'az': 'LT3 at SemEval-2018 Task 1: A classifier chain to detect emotions in tweets', 'bs': 'LT3 na semiEval-2018 Task 1: klasifikatorni lanac za otkrivanje emocija u tweetima', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১-এ এলটি৩: টুইটে অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করার জন্য একটি বিশেষ শেইন', 'cs': 'LT3 na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Řetězec klasifikátorů pro detekci emocí ve tweetech', 'ca': 'LT3 a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Una cadena de classificació per detectar emocions en tweets', 'et': 'LT3 SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: klassifitseerijaahel emotsioonide tuvastamiseks säutsides', 'fi': 'LT3 SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Luokitusketju tunteiden havaitsemiseen tweeteissä', 'jv': 'LT3 nang seminval-2013 task 1:A kategorier string to detect pititis', 'sk': 'LT3 na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: veriga klasifikatorjev za zaznavanje čustev v tweetih', 'he': 'LT3 ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 1: שרשרת מסווג לגלות רגשות בטוויטים', 'ha': 'LT3 at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 1: An kasa wani sarƙo mai ƙayyade wa ya gane hisãbi cikin Twitter', 'bo': 'LT3 at SemEval-2018 Task 1: A classifier chain to detect emotions in tweets'}
{'en': 'This paper presents an emotion classification system for English tweets, submitted for the SemEval shared task on Affect in Tweets, subtask 5 : Detecting Emotions. The system combines lexicon, n-gram, style, syntactic and semantic features. For this multi-class multi-label problem, we created a classifier chain. This is an ensemble of eleven binary classifiers, one for each possible emotion category, where each model gets the predictions of the preceding models as additional features. The predicted labels are combined to get a multi-label representation of the predictions. Our system was ranked eleventh among thirty five participating teams, with a Jaccard accuracy of 52.0 % and macro- and micro-average F1-scores of 49.3 % and 64.0 %, respectively.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نظام تصنيف المشاعر للتغريدات الإنجليزية ، المقدمة لمهمة SemEval المشتركة حول التأثير في التغريدات ، المهمة الفرعية 5: اكتشاف العواطف. يجمع النظام بين ميزات المعجم و n-gram والأسلوب والنحوي والدلالات. لهذه المشكلة متعددة الفئات متعددة الفئات ، أنشأنا سلسلة مصنفات. هذه مجموعة من أحد عشر مصنفًا ثنائيًا ، واحد لكل فئة عاطفة محتملة ، حيث يحصل كل نموذج على تنبؤات النماذج السابقة كميزات إضافية. يتم دمج التسميات المتوقعة للحصول على تمثيل متعدد التسميات للتنبؤات. احتل نظامنا المرتبة الحادية عشرة من بين خمسة وثلاثين فريقًا مشاركًا ، حيث بلغت دقة Jaccard 52.0٪ ومتوسط درجات F1 الكلية والجزئية بنسبة 49.3٪ و 64.0٪ على التوالي.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um sistema de classificação de emoções para tweets em inglês, submetidos à tarefa compartilhada SemEval sobre Affect in Tweets, subtarefa 5: Detecting Emotions. O sistema combina léxico, n-gram, estilo, recursos sintáticos e semânticos. Para este problema multi-rótulo multiclasse, criamos uma cadeia de classificadores. Este é um conjunto de onze classificadores binários, um para cada categoria de emoção possível, onde cada modelo obtém as previsões dos modelos anteriores como recursos adicionais. Os rótulos previstos são combinados para obter uma representação de vários rótulos das previsões. Nosso sistema ficou em décimo primeiro lugar entre trinta e cinco equipes participantes, com uma precisão de Jaccard de 52,0% e pontuações F1 médias macro e micro de 49,3% e 64,0%, respectivamente.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un système de classification des émotions pour les tweets en anglais, soumis pour la tâche partagée SemEval sur Affect dans les Tweets, sous-tâche 5\xa0: Détecter les émotions. Le système combine lexique, n-gramme, style, syntaxique et sémantique. Pour ce problème multi-classes multi-étiquettes, nous avons créé une chaîne de classificateurs. Il s'agit d'un ensemble de onze classificateurs binaires, un pour chaque catégorie d'émotion possible, où chaque modèle obtient les prédictions des modèles précédents en tant que caractéristiques supplémentaires. Les étiquettes prédites sont combinées pour obtenir une représentation multi-étiquettes des prévisions. Notre système a été classé onzième parmi trente-cinq équipes participantes, avec une précision de Jaccard de 52,0\xa0% et des scores F1 macro-et micro-moyens de 49,3\xa0% et 64,0\xa0%, respectivement.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un sistema de clasificación de emociones para tuits en inglés, enviados para la tarea compartida de SemEval sobre Afectar en los Tweets, subtarea 5: Detección de emociones. El sistema combina léxico, n-grama, estilo, características sintácticas y semánticas. Para este problema de etiquetas múltiples de clases múltiples, creamos una cadena de clasificadores. Se trata de un conjunto de once clasificadores binarios, uno para cada categoría de emoción posible, donde cada modelo obtiene las predicciones de los modelos anteriores como características adicionales. Las etiquetas de predicción se combinan para obtener una representación de múltiples etiquetas de las predicciones. Nuestro sistema ocupó el undécimo lugar entre los treinta y cinco equipos participantes, con una precisión de Jaccard del 52,0% y puntajes de F1 macro y micropromedio de 49,3% y 64,0%, respectivamente.', 'ja': 'この論文では、英語のツイートのための感情分類システムを紹介しています。これは、SemEvalの共有タスクである「ツイートに影響を与える」サブタスク5 ：感情の検出のために提出されました。このシステムは、辞書、n - gram、スタイル、構文、およびセマンティック機能を組み合わせています。このマルチクラスのマルチラベル問題のために、私たちは分類チェーンを作成しました。これは、各モデルが追加機能として先行モデルの予測を取得する、11個のバイナリ分類子のアンサンブルであり、可能な感情カテゴリごとに1つです。予測されたラベルを組み合わせて、予測のマルチラベル表現を取得する。当社のシステムは、Jaccardの精度52.0%、マクロ平均F 1スコア49.3%、マイクロ平均F 1スコア64.0%で、35の参加チーム中11位でした。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स के लिए एक भावना वर्गीकरण प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करता है, जो ट्वीट्स में प्रभाव, सबटास्क 5 पर SemEval साझा कार्य के लिए प्रस्तुत किया गया है: भावनाओं का पता लगाना। सिस्टम शब्दकोश, एन-ग्राम, शैली, वाक्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ विशेषताओं को जोड़ती है। इस बहु-श्रेणी बहु-लेबल समस्या के लिए, हमने एक क्लासिफायर श्रृंखला बनाई है। यह ग्यारह बाइनरी क्लासिफायर्स का एक पहनावा है, प्रत्येक संभावित भावना श्रेणी के लिए एक, जहां प्रत्येक मॉडल को अतिरिक्त सुविधाओं के रूप में पूर्ववर्ती मॉडल की भविष्यवाणियां मिलती हैं। भविष्यवाणियों के बहु-लेबल प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करने के लिए अनुमानित लेबल संयुक्त हैं। हमारी प्रणाली पैंतीस भाग लेने वाली टीमों के बीच ग्यारहवें स्थान पर थी, जिसमें क्रमशः 52.0% की जैककार्ड सटीकता और मैक्रो- और माइक्रो-एवरेज एफ 1-स्कोर 49.3% और 64.0% थे।', 'zh': '本文引一英语推文之情类,当统与SemEval共之,即推文中之感,子务5:检测情性。 统合词典,n-gram风格,句法语义特征。 多类多标签,吾侪创一器链。 此十一二进制器之会也,情类一也,以前为附也。 占曰:得其多也。 35支参赛队中排名第11位,Jaccard准确率为52.0%,宏观与微观均F1得分为49.3%64.0%。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена система классификации эмоций для английских твитов, представленная для совместной задачи SemEval по влиянию в твитах, подзадача 5: Обнаружение эмоций. Система объединяет лексику, n-грамму, стиль, синтаксические и семантические особенности. Для этой многоклассовой многоуровневой задачи мы создали цепочку классификаторов. Это ансамбль из одиннадцати двоичных классификаторов, по одному для каждой возможной категории эмоций, где каждая модель получает прогнозы предыдущих моделей в качестве дополнительных функций. Прогнозируемые метки объединяются для получения многоуровневого представления прогнозов. Наша система заняла одиннадцатое место среди тридцати пяти команд-участников, с точностью Жакарда 52,0% и макро- и микросредними показателями F1 49,3% и 64,0% соответственно.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo córas rangaithe mothúcháin i láthair le haghaidh tweets Béarla, a cuireadh isteach don tasc roinnte SemEval ar Affect in Tweets, fothasc 5: Mothúcháin a Bhrath. Comhcheanglaíonn an córas gnéithe foclóireachta, n-gram, stíl, comhréire agus shéimeantach. Maidir leis an bhfadhb il-lipéad il-aicme seo, chruthaigh muid slabhra aicmitheora. Seo ensemble de dhéag aicmitheora dénártha, ceann amháin le haghaidh gach catagóir mothúcháin féideartha, áit a bhfaigheann gach múnla tuar na múnlaí roimhe seo mar ghnéithe breise. Cuirtear na lipéid réamh-mheasta le chéile chun léiriú illipéid a fháil ar na tuartha. Rangaíodh ár gcóras san aonú háit déag i measc tríocha cúig fhoireann rannpháirteacha, le cruinneas Jaccard de 52.0% agus macrai agus micribhithscóir F1 de 49.3% agus 64.0%, faoi seach.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუფიკაცია ინგლისური ტივიტებისთვის ემოციონის კლასიფიკაციის სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval გაყოფილი საქმედებისთვის გაყოფილი საქმედებისთვის, რომელიც შესაძლებელია Tweets-ში, საკითხვა 5 Name ამ მრავალტიკლასის მრავალტიკლასის პრობლემებისთვის, ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციური წერტილის შექმნა. ეს არის 11 ბინერი კლასიფიკაციების შესაძლებლო ემოციონის კატეგორია, რომელიც ყოველ მოდელეც მიიღებს წინასწორი მოდელეების წინასწორება როგორც დამატებული ფუნქციები. პროგრამებული ნიშანები კომბიუნდებიან, რომ მიიღებთ მრავალური ნიშანების გამოსახულება. ჩვენი სისტემა იყო ერთი-ერთი პრონეტი საშუალებელი ხუთი ჯგუფი, რომელიც ექკაპტის წესიერება 52,0% და მაკრო- და მიკრო- საშუალებელი F1 წესიერება 49,3% და 64,0%.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα σύστημα ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων για τα αγγλικά tweets, που υποβλήθηκε για την κοινή εργασία του SemEval σχετικά με το Affect in Tweets, υποεργασία 5: Detection Emotions. Το σύστημα συνδυάζει λεξικό, γραμμάριο, στυλ, συντακτικά και σημασιολογικά χαρακτηριστικά. Για αυτό το πρόβλημα πολλαπλών κατηγοριών δημιουργήσαμε μια αλυσίδα ταξινομητών. Πρόκειται για ένα σύνολο έντεκα δυαδικών ταξινομητών, ένας για κάθε πιθανή κατηγορία συναισθημάτων, όπου κάθε μοντέλο παίρνει τις προβλέψεις των προηγούμενων μοντέλων ως πρόσθετα χαρακτηριστικά. Οι προβλεπόμενες ετικέτες συνδυάζονται για να αποκτήσουν μια αναπαράσταση πολλαπλών ετικετών των προβλέψεων. Το σύστημά μας κατατάχθηκε στην ενδέκατη μεταξύ τριάντα πέντε συμμετεχόντων ομάδων, με ακρίβεια 52,0% και μακρο- και μικρομεσαίες βαθμολογίες 49,3% και 64,0%, αντίστοιχα.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az angol tweetek érzelmi osztályozási rendszerét, amelyet a SemEval megosztott feladatára küldtek be az Affect in Tweets című 5. alcsoportja: Érzelmek felismerése. A rendszer kombinálja a lexikon, n-gram, stílus, szintaktikai és szemantikai jellemzőket. Ehhez a többosztályú többcímkés problémához létrehoztunk egy osztályozói láncot. Ez egy tizenegy bináris osztályozóból álló együttes, minden lehetséges érzelmi kategóriára egy, ahol minden modell kiegészítő funkcióként kap az előző modellek előrejelzéseit. Az előrejelzett címkék kombinálásával több címkén ábrázolhatók az előrejelzések. Rendszerünk a tizenegyedik helyen állt a harmincöt résztvevő csapat közül, 52,0%-os Jaccard pontossággal, 49,3%-os makro- és mikroátlagos F1 pontszámmal, illetve 64,0%-os.', 'it': 'Questo articolo presenta un sistema di classificazione delle emozioni per i tweet inglesi, presentato per il compito condiviso di SemEval su Affect in Tweets, sottotask 5: Detecting Emotions. Il sistema combina lessico, n-gram, stile, sintattica e caratteristiche semantiche. Per questo problema multi-classe multi-etichetta, abbiamo creato una catena di classificatori. Si tratta di un insieme di undici classificatori binari, uno per ogni possibile categoria emotiva, in cui ogni modello ottiene le previsioni dei modelli precedenti come caratteristiche aggiuntive. Le etichette previste sono combinate per ottenere una rappresentazione multi-etichetta delle previsioni. Il nostro sistema si è classificato undicesimo tra trentacinque squadre partecipanti, con una precisione Jaccard del 52,0% e punteggi F1 macro e micro-medi del 49,3% e 64,0%, rispettivamente.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiama emocijų klasifikavimo sistema anglų tweetams, pateikta SemEval bendrai užduotims „Affect in Tweets“, 5 paklausa „Emotions Detecting“. Sistema derina leksikonus, n-gramus, stilius, sintaktines ir semantines savybes. Šiai daugiakalassei daugiakalbei problemai sukūrėme klasifikavimo grandinę. Tai vienuolika dviejų klasifikatorių, vienas kiekvienai galimai emocijų kategorijai, kuriame kiekvienas model is gauna ankstesnių modelių prognozes kaip papildomas savybes. Numatytos etiketės yra sujungtos, kad būtų galima pateikti daugiametį prognozių vaizdą. Mūsų sistema buvo vienuolikta iš trisdešimt penkių dalyvaujančių grupių, o Jaccard tikslumas buvo atitinkamai 52,0 proc., o F1 makro ir mikrovidurkiai – 49,3 proc. ir 64,0 proc.', 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува систем за класификација на емоции за англиски твитови, поднесен за заедничката задача на SemEval за Affect in Tweets, подпрашање 5: Детектирање емоции. Системот комбинира лексикони, n- грам, стил, синтактички и семантични карактеристики. За овој мултикласичен проблем со мултикласичните етикети, создадовме ланец за класификација. Ова е ансембл од 11 бинарни класификатори, еден за секоја можна емоционална категорија, каде секој модел ги добива предвидувањата на претходните модели како дополнителни карактеристики. Предвидените етикети се комбинирани за да се добие мултиетична претстава на предвидувањата. Our system was ranked eleventh among thirty five participating teams, with a Jaccard accuracy of 52.0% and macro- and micro-average F1-scores of 49.3% and 64.0%, respectively.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ағылшынша tweets үшін емоциялық түрлендіру жүйесін көрсетеді. Бұл Tweets үшін SemEval ортақтастырылған тапсырманы таңдау үшін, 5- суреті: Эмоцияларды табу. Жүйе лексикан, n- грамм, стилі, синтактикалық және семантикалық мүмкіндіктерді біріктіреді. Бұл көп класс көп жарлық мәселесі үшін біз классификациялық тізбегін құрдық. Бұл 11 бинарлық классификациялардың белгісі, әрбір мүмкін емоциялық санаттарының бірі. Әрбір үлгісі алдыңғы үлгілерді қосымша мүмкіндіктер ретінде болады. Көптеген жарлықтар таңдау үшін бірнеше жарлықтарды көрсету үшін біріктіріледі. Біздің жүйеміз 30 бес қатысушылық топтардың арасындағы бірінші ретінде бөлінген, якарттың дұрыстығы 52,0% және макро- және микро- орташа F1 деңгейі 49,3% және 64,0% деген.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan sistem klasifikasi emosi untuk tweet Inggeris, dihantar untuk tugas berkongsi SemEval pada Affect dalam Tweets, subtask 5: Mengesan Emotions. Sistem menggabungkan leksikon, n- gram, gaya, ciri- ciri sintaktik dan semantik. Untuk masalah multi-label kelas ini, kami mencipta rantai pengklasifikasi. Ini adalah kumpulan 11 pengklasifikasi binari, satu untuk setiap kategori emosi yang mungkin, di mana setiap model mendapat ramalan model terdahulu sebagai ciri tambahan. Label dijangka digabungkan untuk mendapatkan perwakilan multi-label bagi ramalan. Sistem kami ditandai ke-11 diantara 35 pasukan yang berpartisipasi, dengan akurat Jaccard 52.0% dan skor F1 makro- dan mikro-rata-rata 49.3% dan 64.0%, respectively.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി സെമ്എവാല്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലിക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഒരു വികാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d, n- ഗ്രാം, ശൈലി, സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്കും സെമാന്റിക്ക് വിശേഷങ്ങളും കൂട്ടിചേ ഈ പല-ക്ലാസിന്റെ പല-ലേറ്റ് പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാസിഫയര്\u200d ചങ്ങല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കി. This is an ensemble of eleven binary classifiers, one for each possible emotion category, where each model gets the predictions of the preceding models as additional features.  പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട കുറിപ്പുകളുടെ പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു പല-ലേബത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കാന ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പതിനൊന്നാമത്തേത് പങ്കാളികളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. 52. 0% യാക്കോര്\u200dഡിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തിലും, മാക്', 'mt': 'This paper presents an emotion classification system for English tweets, submitted for the SemEval shared task on Affect in Tweets, subtask 5: Detecting Emotions.  Is-sistema tikkombina karatteristiċi lexicon, n-gram, stil, sintattiċi u semantiċi. Għal din il-problem a multi-klassifikata, ħolqejna katina ta’ klassifikazzjoni. Dan huwa ensemble ta’ ħdax-il klassifikatur binarju, wieħed għal kull kategorija possibbli ta’ emozzjonijiet, fejn kull mudell ikollu t-tbassir tal-mudelli preċedenti bħala karatteristiċi addizzjonali. It-tikketti mbassra huma kkombinati biex jiksbu rappreżentazzjoni b’ħafna tikketti tat-tbassir. Is-sistema tagħna kienet ikklassifikata ħdax fost tletin u ħames timijiet parteċipanti, bi preċiżjoni tal-Jaccard ta’ 52.0% u punteġġi F1 makro- u mikromedja ta’ 49.3% u 64.0%, rispettivament.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Англи tweets-ийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваалтын системийг тайлбарлаж байна. SemEval tweets-ийн хуваалтын ажил дээр тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ систем лексикон, n-грамм, стиль, синтактик болон семантик тодорхойлолтуудыг нэгтгэдэг. Бид олон ангийн олон загварын асуудлын тулд классификацийн хэлхээ бүтээсэн. Энэ бол 11 хоёр дахь хэлбэрийн загвар, боломжтой сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлбэрээр нэг. Загвар бүр өмнөх загварын таамаглалтыг нэмэлт хэлбэрээр авдаг. Тодорхойлогдсон загварууд нь олон загварын илэрхийлэлтэй холбогдож байна. Бидний систем гучин таван оролцогчдын нэгдүгээр нэгдүгээр хуваагдсан бөгөөд якарт 52.0%, макро-болон жижиг дундаж F1 хуваагдсан бөгөөд 49.3%, 64.0%.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ein følelsesklassifikasjonssystem for engelsk tweets, som er sendt til semiEval delt oppgåve på effekt i tweets, underspør 5: Finn følelser. Systemet kombinerer leksikon, n- gram, stil, syntaktiske og semantiske funksjonar. For denne fleire klasse fleire merkelappar, oppretta vi ein klassifiserer kjede. Dette er ein ensembel av 11 binærklassifikatorar, ein for kvar mogleg emosjonskategori, der kvar modell får foregåva av dei førre modelane som fleire funksjonar. Forventa etikettene er kombinerte for å få eit fleire merkelapp representasjon av forventingane. Sistemet vårt var rankert ellevende blant trettifem deltakende grupper, med eit Jaccard-nøyaktighet på 52,0 % og makro- og mikro- gjennomsnittlig F1-poeng med 49,3 % og 64,0 %, respectivt.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono system klasyfikacji emocji dla angielskich tweetów, zgłoszony do wspólnego zadania SemEval dotyczącego Affect in Tweets, podzadanie 5: Detection Emotions. System łączy w sobie leksykon, n-gram, styl, składnia i semantyczne cechy. Dla tego wieloklasjowego problemu wieloznakowania stworzyliśmy łańcuch klasyfikacyjny. Jest to zespół jedenastu klasyfikatorów binarnych, jeden dla każdej możliwej kategorii emocji, gdzie każdy model otrzymuje przewidywania poprzednich modeli jako dodatkowe cechy. Przewidywane etykiety są łączone, aby uzyskać wieloznakową reprezentację prognoz. Nasz system znalazł się na jedenastym miejscu spośród trzydziestu pięciu uczestniczących zespołów, z dokładnością Jaccarda 52,0% oraz makro- i mikrośrednim wynikiem F1 49,3% i 64,0%, odpowiednio.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un sistem de clasificare a emoțiilor pentru tweeturile în limba engleză, depus pentru sarcina comună SemEval pe tema Afect în tweets, subactivitatea 5: Detectarea emoțiilor. Sistemul combină caracteristicile lexicon, n-gram, stil, sintactic și semantic. Pentru această problemă multi-clasă multi-etichetă, am creat un lanț de clasificare. Acesta este un ansamblu de unsprezece clasificatori binari, unul pentru fiecare categorie de emoții posibile, unde fiecare model primește predicțiile modelelor precedente ca caracteristici suplimentare. Etichetele prevăzute sunt combinate pentru a obține o reprezentare multi-etichetă a predicțiilor. Sistemul nostru a fost clasat al unsprezecelea dintre cele treizeci și cinci de echipe participante, cu o precizie Jaccard de 52,0% și scoruri F1 macro și micro-medii de 49,3% și respectiv 64,0%.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුවේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට්ස් වලට හැඟීම් විශේෂ පද්ධතියක් පෙන්වනවා, සෙම්විල් විශේෂ වැඩකට ට්විට්ස් වලට පෙන් Name මේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි විශේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගත්තා. This is an ensEmble of eleven Binary classifiers, one for all may emoticons category, where any Model Gets the forecast of the preceding Models as extra Featuries. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ලේබල් එක්කම් වෙනවා විශ්නයක් ගොඩක් ලේබල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගන්න. අපේ පද්ධතිය අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අංශි අං', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sistem klasifikacije emocija za engleske tweets, podignut za zajednièki zadatak na semiEvalu o Afektu na Tweets, podpitanje 5: Detektiv emocija. Sistem kombinira leksikon, n-gram, stil, sintaktične i semantične karakteristike. Za ovaj multiklasni multi-etiketni problem, stvorili smo klasifikatorni lanac. Ovo je ensemble od 11 binarnih klasifikatora, jedan za svaku moguću kategoriju emocija, gde svaki model dobija predviđanja prethodnih modela kao dodatne karakteristike. Predviđene etikete su kombinirane kako bi dobili višestruku etiketu predviđanja. Naš sistem je bio određen 11 među trideset pet sudjelujućih timova, sa preciznošću Jaccard-a od 52,0% i makro-i mikro-prosječnih F1-rezultata od 49,3% i 64,0%.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa soo bandhigaya nidaamka isqabsashada luuqada Ingiriiska, kaas oo loo dhiibay shaqo saabsan ee SemEval oo ku saabsan Effect ku saabsan Tweetka, subxaf 5: Garashada Emotions. Isticmaalku wuxuu isku biiriyaa lexicon, n-gram, style, syntactic iyo semantic. dhibaatadan fasalka badan oo kala duduwan, waxaan abuurnay silsilad fasax ah. Kanu waa tusaale ahaan koob iyo toban fasax oo labaad ah, mid kastoo u suurtowda xisaabta fikrada, kaas oo model walba ka helaya wixii uu ka hor dhigay tusaalihii kale oo gaar ah. Calaamadaha la soo sheegay waxaa lagu soo wada ururiyaa si ay u helaan mid ka mid ah aqoonsiga labo badan. Tirkanaga waxaa laga dhigay koox kow iyo toban koox oo ka mid ah shan iyo soddon qayb-qayb, si rasmi ah waxaa loo dhigay Jackad 52.0 % iyo macro- iyo qiyaastii qiimaha F1 ee ugu dhexeeya 49.3 % iyo 64.0 boqolkiiba.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar ett kﾃ､nsloklassificeringssystem fﾃｶr engelska tweets, inlﾃ､mnat fﾃｶr SemEvals delade uppgift om Affect in Tweets, underuppgift 5: Detecting Emotions. Systemet kombinerar lexikon, n-gram, stil, syntaktiska och semantiska funktioner. Fﾃｶr detta multi-class multi-label problem skapade vi en klassificeringskedja. Detta ﾃ､r en ensemble av elva binﾃ､ra klassificerare, en fﾃｶr varje mﾃｶjlig kﾃ､nslokategori, dﾃ､r varje modell fﾃ･r fﾃｶrutsﾃ､gelserna av de fﾃｶregﾃ･ende modellerna som ytterligare funktioner. De fﾃｶrutspﾃ･dda etiketterna kombineras fﾃｶr att fﾃ･ en multi-label representation av fﾃｶrutsﾃ､gelserna. Vﾃ･rt system rankades som elfte bland trettiofem deltagande lag, med en Jaccard-noggrannhet pﾃ･ 52,0% och makro- och mikrogenomsnittliga F1-poﾃ､ng pﾃ･ 49,3% respektive 64,0%.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஆங்கிலத்திற்கான உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தல் அமைப்பை கூட்டுகிறது, செம்வால் விளைவுகளில் பகிர்ந்த பணிக்கு வழங்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, து கணினி லெக்சிகோன், n- gram, style, syntactic and semantic தன்மைகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறது. பல வகுப்பு பலவிதமான பிரச்சனைக்கு, நாம் ஒரு வகுப்பான சங்கிலியை உருவாக்கினோம். This is an ensemble of eleven binary classifiers, one for each possible emotion category, where each model gets the predictions of the preceding models as additional features.  முன்னோட்டத்தின் பலவிளக்கச்சீட்டு முன்வாக்கியத்தின் குறிப்பிட்ட குறியீடுகளை இணைக்கப்படும். எங்கள் அமைப்பு முப்பது ஐந்து பகிர்ந்துகொள்ளும் குழுவில் 11 பங்கீடுகள் உள்ளது, 52. 0% மற்றும் மேக்ரோ மற்றும் மிக்ரோ மற்றும் சிறு சராசரி F1 புள்ளிகள்', 'ur': 'This paper presents an emotional classification system for English tweets, submitted for the SemEval shared task on tweets, subtask 5: Detecting Emotions. سیسٹم لکسیکن، ن- گرم، استیل، سینٹکتیک اور سیمنٹی ویٹیوں کو ترکیب کرتا ہے. ہم نے ایک کلاسیر زنجیر پیدا کیا۔ یہ eleven binary classifiers کا ایک انتشار ہے، ہر احساسات کاٹی کے لئے ایک، جہاں ہر مدل پہلے موڈل کی پیش بینی اضافہ کے طور پر حاصل کرتا ہے. پیش بینی لیبل ان پیش بینی کے متعدد لگانے کے لئے جمع کئے جاتے ہیں. ہمارا سیستم تیس پانچ شرکت گروہوں میں eleventh رقم کیا گیا تھا، جک کارڈ کے مطابق 52.0% اور مکرو اور میکرو-میکرو-میکرو-متوسط F1-اسکور 49.3% اور 64.0%.', 'uz': "This paper presents an emotion classification system for English tweets, submitted for the SemEval shared task on Affect in Tweets, subtask 5: Detecting Emotions.  Name Bu ko'plab-ko'plab muammolari uchun biz bir klassifik bir necha boshqaruvni yaratdik. Bu 11 bir bir xil turlarining biri misol, har bir hissiyot turi uchun bir model, har bir model qoʻshimcha moslamalar deb tushunadi. @ label Bizning tizimmiz soddon besh bo'lgan guruhdagi 11 dan boshlangan, 52.0% va makro- va mikro- va kichkina F1 qismi 49.3% va 64.0%.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cung cấp một hệ thống phân tích cảm xúc của tiếng Anh, được gửi cho nhiệm vụ chia sẻ SemEvl về tác dụng trong Tweet, phụ đề 5: Việc phát hiện cảm xúc. Hệ thống kết hợp độ văn học, n-gram, phong cách, cấu trúc cú pháp và ngữ pháp. Với vấn đề đa hạng này, chúng tôi đã tạo ra chuỗi phân loại. Đây là một kết hợp của một số nhị phân, một cho mỗi loại cảm xúc có thể, trong đó mỗi mô hình nhận được dự đoán của các mô hình trước như tính năng phụ. Những nhãn được dự đoán kết hợp để được đại diện đa nhãn của dự đoán. Hệ thống của chúng tôi được xếp hạng thứ bảy trong ba mươi năm đội tham gia, với độ chính xác thời chụp X-2.0. và vi- và vi-suất F1-điểm của 42.3. và 60. Name', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sistem klasifikacije emocija za engleske tweets, podignut za zajednički zadatak na semiEvalu o utjecaji na Tweets, podpitanje 5: Otkrivanje emocija. Sistem kombinira leksikon, n- gram, stil, sintaktične i semantične funkcije. Za ovaj multiklasni multi-etiketni problem, stvorili smo klasični lanac. To je ensemble od 11 binarnih klasifikatora, jedan za svaku moguću kategoriju emocija, gdje svaki model dobija predviđanja prethodnih modela kao dodatne karakteristike. Predviđene etikete su kombinirane kako bi dobili višestruku etiketu predviđanja. Naš sustav je bio određen jedanaest među trideset pet sudjelujućih timova, s preciznošću Jaccard-a od 52,0% i makro-i mikro-prosječnih F1-rezultata od 49,3% i 64,0%.', 'bg': 'Статията представя система за класификация на емоциите на английски туитове, подадени за споделената задача на тема "Афект в туитове", подзадача 5: Откриване на емоции. Системата съчетава лексикон, н-грам, стил, синтактичен и семантичен характер. За този многокласен многоетикетен проблем създадохме верига класификатори. Това е ансамбъл от единадесет двоични класификатори, по един за всяка възможна емоционална категория, където всеки модел получава прогнозите на предходните модели като допълнителни функции. Прогнозираните етикети се комбинират, за да се получи многоетикетно представяне на прогнозите. Системата ни се класира на единадесето място сред тридесет и пет участващи отбора, с точност на Жакард 52,0% и макро- и микросредни резултати съответно 49,3% и 64,0%.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een systeem van emotie classificatie voor Engelse tweets, ingediend voor de SemEval gedeelde taak Affect in Tweets, subtaak 5: Detecting Emotions. Het systeem combineert lexicon, n-gram, stijl, syntactische en semantische kenmerken. Voor dit multi-class multi-label probleem hebben we een classificatieketen gecreëerd. Dit is een ensemble van elf binaire classificatoren, één voor elke mogelijke emotiecategorie, waarbij elk model de voorspellingen van de voorgaande modellen als extra kenmerken krijgt. De voorspelde labels worden gecombineerd om een multi-label weergave van de voorspellingen te krijgen. Ons systeem stond op de elfde plaats van vijfendertig deelnemende teams, met een Jaccard nauwkeurigheid van 52,0% en macro- en microgemiddelde F1-scores van respectievelijk 49,3% en 64,0%, respectievelijk.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer et følelsesklassificeringssystem for engelske tweets, indsendt til SemEval delte opgave om Affect in Tweets, underopgave 5: Detecting Emotions. Systemet kombinerer leksikon, n-gram, stil, syntaktiske og semantiske funktioner. Til dette multi-class multi-label problem skabte vi en klassificeringskæde. Dette er et ensemble af elleve binære klassikere, en for hver mulig følelseskategori, hvor hver model får forudsigelserne af de foregående modeller som yderligere funktioner. De forudsigede etiketter kombineres for at få en multi-label repræsentation af forudsigelserne. Vores system blev rangeret ellevte blandt tredive fem deltagende hold, med en Jaccard nøjagtighed på 52,0% og makro- og mikrogennemsnitlige F1-scorer på henholdsvis 49,3% og 64,0%.', 'ko': '본고는 영어 트윗 감정 분류 시스템을 제시하여 SemEval에 트윗 감정에 대한 공유 임무를 제출했다. 하위 임무 5: 감정을 측정한다.이 시스템은 어휘, 문법, 풍격, 문법과 의미 특징을 결합시켰다.이 여러 종류의 탭 문제에 대해 분류기 체인을 만들었습니다.이것은 11개의 이원 분류기로 구성된 집합으로 각 이원 분류기는 가능한 감정 유형에 대응하고 각 모델은 앞의 모델의 예측을 부가 특징으로 한다.예측된 라벨을 조합하여 예측된 다중 라벨 표시를 얻다.우리 시스템은 35개 참가팀 중 11위, Jaccard 정확도는 52.0%, 거시와 미시 평균 F1 성적은 각각 49.3%와 64.0%였다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan sistem klasifikasi emosi untuk tweet Inggris, dikirim untuk tugas SemEval berbagi pada Affect in Tweets, subtask 5: Detekting Emotions. Sistem menggabungkan leksikon, n-gram, gaya, karakteristik sintaktik dan semantis. Untuk masalah multi-label kelas ini, kami menciptakan rantai klasifikasi. Ini adalah sebuah ensemble dari 11 klasifikasi binari, satu untuk setiap kategori emosi yang mungkin, di mana setiap model mendapatkan prediksi dari model sebelumnya sebagai fitur tambahan. Label yang diprediksi dikombinasikan untuk mendapatkan representation multi-label dari prediksi. Sistem kami ditandai ke-11 diantara 35 tim yang berpartisipasi, dengan akurasi Jaccard 52,0% dan makro- dan mikro-rata-rata F1 49,3% dan 64,0%, respectively.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt ein Emotionsklassifikationssystem für englische Tweets vor, das für die SemEval-gemeinsame Aufgabe Affekt in Tweets, Subtask 5: Detecting Emotions, eingereicht wurde. Das System kombiniert lexikon, n-gram, style, syntaktische und semantische Merkmale. Für dieses Multi-Class Multi-Label Problem haben wir eine Klassifikator Kette erstellt. Dies ist ein Ensemble von elf binären Klassifikatoren, einer für jede mögliche Emotionskategorie, wobei jedes Modell die Vorhersagen der vorhergehenden Modelle als zusätzliche Merkmale erhält. Die vorhergesagten Labels werden kombiniert, um eine Multi-Label-Darstellung der Vorhersagen zu erhalten. Unser System war Elfter unter fünfunddreißig teilnehmenden Teams, mit einer Jaccard Genauigkeit von 52,0% und makro- und mikrodurchschnittlichen F1-Scores von 49,3% und 64,0%, jeweils.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک سیستم جدایی احساسات برای توئیت انگلیسی را نشان می دهد، که برای کار مشترک سیم Eval در توئیت ارائه می شود، پاسپرس ۵: شناسایی احساسات. Name برای این مشکل multi-class multi-label، یک زنجیر محرمانه ایجاد کردیم. این یک نمونه از ۱۱ کلاس دویینی است، یکی برای هر گروه احساسات ممکن است، جایی که هر مدل پیش بینی مدل پیشینیان را به عنوان ویژه های اضافه می گیرد. برچسب\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی برای پیدا کردن نمایش برچسب\u200cهای زیادی از پیش\u200cبینی ترکیب می\u200cشوند. سیستم ما در میان ۳۰ تیم شرکت\u200cکننده ۱۱ درجه بود، با دقیق جکارت ۲۲.۰ درصد و مکرو و میکرومتوسط F1 درجه ۴۹.۳ درصد و ۶۴.۰ درصد.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz Iňlisler tweets üçin duýgyş klasifikasy sistemasyny görkezýär, SemEval\'yň tweets sistemasynda "Affect" tarapynda ylalaşýar. Bu sistem leksikon, n-gram, stil, sintaktik we semantik karakterlerni birleştirir. Bu multi-sınıf multi-etiket meselesi üçin, klasifikatçy bir zincir bejerdik. Bu on bir iki sanat sanatçysynyň bir köpüsi, her metin duýgular kategoriýasy üçin bir nusga, ol ýerde her nusga öňki nusgalaryň öňki nusgalarynyň bir köpüsi bolar. Önümüzdeki etiketler tahmin edenlerinin çoklu etiketli temsilini almak için birleştirildir. Bizim sistemimiz otuz beş topardan on birisi derecelendir. Bu derecede Jaccard düzgünliki 52.0% ve makro-we küçük ortalama F1 noktaları 49.3% we 64.0%-dir.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha mfumo wa kutangaza hisia kwa twiti za Kiingereza, lililotolewa kwa ajili ya SemEval kushirikiana na kazi inayohusiana na Afya kwenye twita, ujumbe wa ujumbe wa 5: Kuchunguza Emotions. Mfumo unaunganisha lexico, n-gram, mtindo, syntactic na semantic. Kwa matatizo haya ya darasa nyingi, tulitengeneza mfungwa mkubwa. Hii ni mfano wa wataalamu wa miwili kumi na moja, moja kwa kila aina ya hisia inayowezekana, ambapo kila model anapata utabiri wa mifano ya zamani kama tabia za ziada. Alama zilizotabiriwa zimewekwa pamoja ili kupata uwakilishi wa mitandao mbalimbali ya utabiri. Mfumo wetu ulikuwa wa rangi ya kumi na moja kati ya timu thelathini tano ya ushiriki, ukiwa na uhakika wa Jaccard wa asilimia 52.0 na wastani wa F1 wa wastani kidogo wa asilimia 49.3 na asilimia 64.0.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n emosie klassifikasie stelsel vir Engelske tweets voorsien, wat vir die SemEval gedeelde taak op Afteks in Tweets ondersoek word, ondersoek 5: Besoek Emotisies. Name Vir hierdie multiklas multi- etiket probleem het ons 'n klassifiseerder ketting geskep. Hierdie is 'n ensemble van elf binêre klassifiseerders, een vir elke moontlike emosie kategorie, waar elke model kry die voorskoude van die voorheede modele as addisionele funksies. Die voorskoude etikette word gekombineer om 'n veelvuldige etikette voorskou van die voorskou te kry. Ons stelsel is gelyk elfde onder dertig vyf deelnadeerde teams, met 'n Jaccard-presisie van 52,0% en makro- en mikro-gemiddelde F1-telling van 49,3% en 64,0%, respectively.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një sistem klasifikimi emocional për tweetet angleze, paraqitur për detyrën e përbashkët të SemEval mbi Afektin në Tweet, nënpyetje 5: Detektimi i Emocioneve. The system combines lexicon, n-gram, style, syntactic and semantic features.  Për këtë problem me shumë klasa, krijuam një zinxhir klasifikues. Ky është një komplet prej njëmbëdhjetë klasifikuesve binarë, një për çdo kategori emocionale të mundshme, ku çdo model merr parashikimet e modeleve të mëparshëm si karakteristika shtesë. Etiketat e parashikuara janë të kombinuara për të marrë një përfaqësim me shumë etiketa të parashikimeve. Sistemi ynë u rendit i njëmbëdhjetë midis tridhjetë e pesë ekipave pjesëmarrëse, me një saktësi të Jaccardit prej 52.0% dhe rezultate makro- dhe mikromesatare F1 prej 49.3% dhe 64.0%, respektivisht.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የኢንጂልኛ ትዊተሮች ላይ ለSemEval በተዊተሮች ላይ የተጠቃሚ ስራ የኢንተርኔት መግለጫ ስርዓት ያሳየዋል፡፡ ሲስተምሩ ሊክሲን፣ n-gram፣ ዘይት፣ Syntactic እና semantic ጥያቄዎችን የሚያሳስብ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ በብዙ-ደረጃ ብዙኃን መከራ፣ ክፍለ ማሰሪያ ፈጥረናል፡፡ ይህም የአሥራ አንድ ብናር ክፍሎች ምሳሌ ነው፥ ለሁሉም የሚቻለው የስሜት ክፍል፣ እያንዳንዱ ሞዴል የቀድሞውን የፊተኞቹን ዓይነቶች ለመጨመር የፊደል ምርጫዎች ትንቢት ያገኛል፡፡ የተቀየፉት ምልክቶች ለትንቢት ብዙው-label ምረጡ ለማግኘት ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ በሠላሳ አምስት ተጋሪዎች ቡድን ውስጥ አሥራ አንደኛው ደረጃ ተደረገ፤ በ 52.0 በመቶ እና ማክሮና በሚክሮው የF1 ትውልድ ቁጥር 49.3 በመቶ እና 64.0 በመቶ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է անգլերենի թվիթերի զգացմունքների դասակարգման համակարգ, որը ներկայացված է "Աֆեկտ Թվիթերում" կիսված հանձնարարության համար, 5-րդ ենթահարցի\' Էմոցիաներ հայտնաբերելու համար: Համակարգը համադրում է լեքսիկոն, n-գրամ, ոճ, սինտակտիկ և սեմանտիկ հատկություններ: Այս բազմադասական բազմադասական պիտակների համար մենք ստեղծեցինք դասակարգման շղթա: Սա միավոր է տասնմյակ երկու դասակարգչից, մեկը յուրաքանչյուր հնարավոր զգացմունքների կատեգորիայի համար, որտեղ յուրաքանչյուր մոդել ստանում է նախորդ մոդելների կանխատեսումները որպես ավելին հատկություններ: Պատկերացված պիտակները համադրվում են, որպեսզի ստանանք բազմաթիվ պիտակների պատկերացում կանխատեսումների մասին: Our system was ranked eleventh among thirty five participating teams, with a Jaccard accuracy of 52.0% and macro- and micro-average F1-scores of 49.3% and 64.0%, respectively.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt İngilizci tweetlər üçün duygusal klasifikasyon sistemini göstərir, Tövetlərdə SemEval paylaşılan işləri üçün göndərilir, 5-si altsual: Emotiyaları keşfetir. Sistem leksikon, n-gram, stil, sintaktik və semantik xüsusiyyətləri birləşdirir. Bu çoxlu sınıf çoxlu etiketli problemi üçün, biz klassifik zinciri yaratdıq. Bu on ikili klasifikatın bir ensembli, hər mümkün emosyon kategoriyası üçün, hər modeli əvvəlki modellərin tədbirlərini əlavə özelliklər kimi alır. Önümüzdeki etiketlər tədbirlərin çoxlu etiketli göstərilməsi üçün birləşdirilmişdir. Sistemimiz otuz beş istifadə edən takımların arasında on birinci dərəcə idi. Jaccard dərəcəsi 52,0 % və makro-və mikro-ortalama F1 dərəcələri 49,3 % və 64,0 % idi.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ইংরেজী টুইটের জন্য একটি আবেগের ক্লাসাফিকেশন ব্যবস্থা উপস্থাপন করেছে, যা টুইটে সেমEval প্রভাবিত করার জন্য জমা দেয়া হয়েছে, সাব্বা সিস্টেম লেক্সিকোন, n-gram, style, syntactic and Seantic features একত্রিত করে। এই বহুক্ষেত্রের মাল্টিলেট সমস্যার জন্য আমরা একটা শ্রেণীবিভাগের চেইন তৈরি করেছি। এটা ১১টি বাইনারি বিভাগের একটি স্বতন্ত্র, প্রত্যেকটি সম্ভাব্য আবেগের বিভাগের জন্য এক, যেখানে প্রত্যেক মডেলের পূর্ববর্তী মডেলের ভবিষ্য The predicted labels are combined to get a multi-label representation of the predictions.  আমাদের সিস্টেম ত্রিশ পাঁচ অংশগ্রহণকারী দলের মধ্যে ১১ ভাগ ছিল, যার মধ্যে ৫২. ০% এবং ম্যাক্রো- এবং মাইক্রো স্কোর ৪৯.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un sistema de classificació emocional per tweets anglesos, presentat per la tasca compartida SemEval sobre Affect in Tweets, subtema 5: Detecting Emotions. El sistema combina característiques lexicòniques, n-gram, estils, sinàctiques i semàntiques. Per aquest problem a multiclasse, vam crear una cadena de classificació. Aquest és un conjunt d'onze classificadors binaris, un per cada possible categoria d'emocions, on cada model obté les prediccions dels models anteriors com característiques adicionals. Les etiquetes predites estan combinades per obtenir una representació multietiquetada de les prediccions. El nostre sistema va ser l'onze entre 35 equips participants, amb una precisió Jaccard del 52,0% i una puntuació F1 macro i micromitjana del 49,3% i 64,0%, respectivament.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sistem klasifikacije emocija za engleske tweets, podignut za zajednički zadatak SemEval o Affectu na Tweets, podpitanje 5: Detektiv emocija. Sistem kombinira leksikon, n-gram, stil, sintaktične i semantične funkcije. Za ovaj multiklasni multi-etiketni problem, stvorili smo klasifikatorni lanac. Ovo je ensemble od 11 binarnih klasifikatora, jedan za svaku moguću kategoriju emocija, gdje svaki model dobija predviđanja prethodnih modela kao dodatne karakteristike. Predviđene etikete su kombinirane kako bi dobili višestruku etiketu predviđanja. Naš sistem je bio određen 11 među trideset pet sudjelujućih timova, sa preciznošću Jaccard-a od 52,0% i makro-i mikro-prosječnih F1-rezultata od 49,3% i 64,0%, odnosno.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje systém klasifikace emocí pro anglické tweety, který byl předložen pro sdílený úkol SemEval o Affect in Tweets, podúkol 5: Detekce emocí. Systém kombinuje lexikon, n-gram, styl, syntaktické a sémantické prvky. Pro tento problém s vícetřídními víceštítky jsme vytvořili řetězec klasifikátorů. Jedná se o soubor jedenácti binárních klasifikátorů, jeden pro každou možnou emoční kategorii, kde každý model dostane predikce předchozích modelů jako doplňkové vlastnosti. Předpokládané štítky jsou kombinovány tak, aby získaly reprezentaci predikcí více štítků. Náš systém byl mezi třiceti pěti zúčastněnými týmy jedenáctý, s Jaccardovou přesností 52,0% a makro- a mikroprůměrným F1 skóre 49,3% a 64,0%, respektive.', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa esitellﾃ､ﾃ､n englanninkielisten twiittien tunneluokitusjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､, joka on lﾃ､hetetty SemEvalin jaettuun tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n Affect in Tweets, alatehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n 5: Tunteiden havaitseminen. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ssﾃ､ yhdistyvﾃ､t sanasto, n-gramma, tyyli, syntaktiset ja semanttiset ominaisuudet. Tﾃ､tﾃ､ moniluokkaista monimerkkiongelmaa varten loimme luokitteluketjun. Tﾃ､mﾃ､ on yksitoista binﾃ､ﾃ､riluokittelijaa koostuva kokonaisuus, yksi kutakin mahdollista tunneluokkaa kohti, jossa jokainen malli saa edeltﾃ､vien mallien ennusteet lisﾃ､ominaisuuksina. Ennustetut merkinnﾃ､t yhdistetﾃ､ﾃ､n, jotta ennusteista saadaan moniselitteinen esitys. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme sijoittui yhdeksﾃ､nnenneksi 35 osallistujajoukkueen joukosta Jaccardin tarkkuudella 52,0% ja makro- ja mikrokeskiarvoilla 49,3% ja 64,0%.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö tutvustab inglise keele säutsude emotsioonide klassifitseerimise süsteemi, mis on esitatud SemEvali jagatud ülesandele Afect in Tweets, alaülesanne 5: Tundete tuvastamine. Süsteem ühendab leksikoni, n-grammi, stiili, süntaktilisi ja semantilisi omadusi. Selle mitmeklassilise mitmeklassilise märgisega probleemi jaoks loosime klassifitseerimisahela. See on üheteistkümnest binaarsest klassifitseerijast koosnev ansambl, üks iga võimaliku emotsioonikategooria kohta, kus iga mudel saab eelnevate mudelite prognoosid lisafunktsioonidena. Prognoositavad sildid kombineeritakse, et saada prognooside mitme sildi esitus. Meie süsteem oli kolmekümne viie osaleva meeskonna seas üheteistkümnendal kohal, Jaccardi täpsus 52,0% ning makro- ja mikrokeskmine F1-skoor 49,3% ja 64,0%.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki ngetok sistem panjenengan langgambar kanggo tuwit Inggris, ngetok kanggo kelas seminval kang AfEffect nang Tuwit, supoyo 5: Geweke Etiketan. input method politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Punika ingkang kabèh kalih-sanga sing paling-sanga kuwi, siji-sangan kanggo sabên malah sampeyan ingkang sampeyan, sapa model kuwi nggawe prebisa-sijib model sing diangubah sampeyan lagi diangubah. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sistem awak dhéwé wis digowolèh sing katênêr weh-sangan sing katênêr, karo Jackart sing wis nambah sabêr gewis ambang nggawe wih-ambang% karo macro- lan mikro-mlayen F1 sing 49.3% lan 64.0%, menehi', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na gaya wani tsarin hiso na ɗabi'a wa littafin Ingiriya, wanda aka wajabta wa shirin aikin Semeval da aka yi shirin su Affect a kan Twitter, sub-aikin 5: Ana gane Emiratan. @ action: button Ji da wannan matsayin mai yawa-nau'i, mun halitta wani sarƙƙi mai fassara. Wannan wani misali ne daga fasalin sau biyu guda, ɗayan wa kõwace categori na iya iya son hisãbi, inda duk motel ya motsi na farko kamar sifati ƙari. Ana haɗa alama da aka ƙayyade dõmin a sami wani mai yawan-label mai nuna wa birnin. Ana sami aikin mu na tsakanin kow ɗaya daga jama'a matattu, kuma aka samu taƙaitar nau'in jeriya 52.0 da macro-da micro-gwargwadon F1 na henhold 49.3% da 64.0%.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen sistem klasifikacije čustev za angleške tweete, predložen za skupno nalogo SemEval o vplivu v tweetih, podnalogo 5: Zaznavanje čustev. Sistem združuje leksikon, n-gram, slog, sintaktične in semantične značilnosti. Za ta večrazredni problem z več oznakami smo ustvarili verigo klasifikatorjev. To je ansambl enajstih binarnih klasifikatorjev, eden za vsako možno čustveno kategorijo, kjer vsak model dobi napovedi prejšnjih modelov kot dodatne funkcije. Predvidene oznake so združene, da bi dobili več oznak predstavitve napovedi. Naš sistem je bil med petintridesetimi sodelujočimi ekipami uvrščen na enajsto mesto, z Jaccardovo natančnostjo 52,0% in makro- in mikropovprečno oceno F1 49,3% oziroma 64,0%.', 'he': "העבודה הזו מציגה מערכת סיווג רגשות לטוויטים אנגליים, מועברת למשימה המשותפת של SemEval על השפעה בטוויטים, subtask 5: Detecting Emotions. The system combines lexicon, n-gram, style, syntactic and semantic features.  עבור הבעיה עם תוויות רבות במערכת זו, יצרנו שרשרת קלאסיפור. זהו אסמבל של 11 קלאסיפורים בינריים, אחד לכל קטגוריה רגשית אפשרית, שבו כל דוגמן מקבל את התחזויות של הדוגמנים הקודמים כתכונות נוספות. התוויות הנצפויות משולבות כדי לקבל מייצג רב-תוויות של התחזויות. המערכת שלנו הוצבה ב-11 בין שלושים וחמש קבוצות משתתפות, עם מדויקת ג'אקארד של 52.0% ולנקודות F1 מקרו- ומיקרו-ממוצע של 49.3% ול64.0%, בהתאם.", 'bo': 'ཨིན་ཇིའི་Tweets་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་གླེང་སྡོམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། The system combines lexicon, n-gram, style, syntactic and semantic features. དབྱེ་སྣ་གྲངས་སྣ་མང་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདིས་ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་རྫགས་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས། This is an ensemble of twelve classifiers, one for each possible emotion category, where each model gets the predictions of the preceding models as additional features. སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཚུ་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་ནས་སྔོན་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་མང་ཙམ་མཚོན་གྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དབར་སྡེའི་ནང་དུ་བཅུ་གཅིག་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'SINAI at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Emotion Recognition in Tweets', 'ar': 'SINAI في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: التعرف على المشاعر في التغريدات', 'fr': 'SINAI au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 1\xa0: Reconnaissance des émotions dans les tweets', 'pt': 'SINAI no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Reconhecimento de Emoções em Tweets', 'es': 'SINAI en Semeval-2018 Tarea 1: Reconocimiento de emociones en tuits', 'ja': 'SINAI at SemEval -2018タスク1 ：ツイートにおける感情認識', 'zh': '西奈在SemEval-20181:推情识', 'ru': 'SINAI на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Распознавание эмоций в твитах', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर SINAI: Tweets में भावना पहचान', 'ga': 'SINAI ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Aitheantas Mothúcháin i dTvuíteanna', 'ka': 'SINAI semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 1: ემოციონის მიღება Tweets-ში', 'el': 'Καθήκον 1: Αναγνώριση Συναισθημάτων στα Τουίτερ', 'lt': 'SINAI 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 1 užduotis: emocijų pripažinimas Tweetuose', 'it': 'SINAI a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Riconoscimento emotivo nei Tweet', 'ms': 'SINAI di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Pengenalan Emosi dalam Tweets', 'kk': 'SINAI 1- шегінші тапсырма: Твиттерде көңіл белгілеу', 'mk': 'СИНАИ на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Признавање на емоции на твитови', 'mt': 'SINAI f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Rikonoxximent tal-Emożjonijiet fit-Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലി', 'hu': 'SINAI a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: érzelmi felismerés tweetekben', 'no': 'SINAI på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Emotion Recognition in Tweets', 'pl': 'SINAI na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Rozpoznawanie emocji w tweetach', 'mn': 'СИНАИ-ын SemEval-2018 Task 1: Твиттийн мэдрэмжүүдийн танилцлага', 'ro': 'SINAI la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Recunoașterea emoțiilor în tweets', 'sr': 'SINAI na semiEval-2018 Task 1: priznanje emocija u Tweets', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் SINAI 1: Tweets இல் உணர்வு அறிதல்', 'ur': 'سینا ایل-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں: ٹویٹ میں ایموٹیون شناخت', 'sv': 'SINAI på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Känslighetsigenkänning i tweets', 'si': 'SINAI at semeval-2018 Job 1: Emotion Known in Tweets', 'so': 'SINAI Shaqada SemEval-2018 1: Aqoonshaha Emotion ee Twitter', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'SINAI tại SemEvl-208 Task 1: nhận dạng trong Tweet', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Разпознаване на емоциите в туитове', 'hr': 'SINAI na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: priznanje emocija u Tweets', 'nl': 'SINAI op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Emotieherkenning in Tweets', 'da': 'SINAI på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Følelsesgenkendelse i tweets', 'de': 'SINAI auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Emotionserkennung in Tweets', 'ko': '시네반도SemEval-2018퀘스트1: 트위터의 정서인식', 'fa': 'SINAI در ماموریت ۱: شناختن احساسات در Tweets', 'id': 'SINAI di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Pengenalan Emosi di Tweets', 'sq': 'SINAI në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Recognition in Tweets', 'tr': 'SINAI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Recognition in Tweets', 'af': 'Sinai by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: Emotie Herkenning in Tweets', 'sw': 'SINAI katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Tambulisho la hisia katika twita', 'am': 'ስምEval-2018 ስራ 1: የኢትዮጵያ ማስታወቂያ በTweets', 'hy': 'SINAI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Recognition in Tweets', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets içində Emotion Recognition', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের সিনাই ১: টুইটারে স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করা হয়েছে।', 'bs': 'SINAI na semiEval-2018 Task 1: priznanje emocija u Tweets', 'cs': 'SINAI na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Rozpoznávání emocí ve tweetech', 'ca': 'SINAI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Recognition in Tweets', 'et': 'SINAI SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Emotsioonide äratundmine tweetides', 'fi': 'SINAI SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Tunteiden tunnistaminen tweeteissä', 'jv': '%1', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'SINAI na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Prepoznavanje čustev v tweetih', 'he': 'SINAI ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: זיהוי רגשות בטוויטים', 'bo': 'SINAI at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Recognition in Tweets'}
{'en': 'Emotion classification is a new task that combines several disciplines including Artificial Intelligence and Psychology, although Natural Language Processing is perhaps the most challenging area. In this paper, we describe our participation in SemEval-2018 Task1 : Affect in Tweets. In particular, we have participated in EI-oc, EI-reg and E-c subtasks for English and Spanish languages.', 'ar': 'تصنيف العاطفة هو مهمة جديدة تجمع بين العديد من التخصصات بما في ذلك الذكاء الاصطناعي وعلم النفس ، على الرغم من أن معالجة اللغة الطبيعية ربما تكون أكثر المجالات صعوبة. في هذه الورقة ، نصف مشاركتنا في SemEval-2018 Task1: التأثير في التغريدات. على وجه الخصوص ، لقد شاركنا في المهام الفرعية EI-oc و EI-reg و E-c للغات الإنجليزية والإسبانية.', 'fr': "La classification des émotions est une nouvelle tâche qui combine plusieurs disciplines, dont l'intelligence artificielle et la psychologie, bien que le traitement du langage naturel soit peut-être le domaine le plus difficile. Dans cet article, nous décrivons notre participation à la Tâche1 de SEMEVAL-2018\xa0: Affect in Tweets. Nous avons notamment participé aux sous-tâches Ei-OC, EI-Reg et e-C pour les langues anglaise et espagnole.", 'es': 'La clasificación de emociones es una nueva tarea que combina varias disciplinas, incluidas la Inteligencia Artificial y la Psicología, aunque el procesamiento del lenguaje natural es quizás el área más desafiante. En este artículo, describimos nuestra participación en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Efecto en los Tweets. En particular, hemos participado en subtareas Ei-OC, Ei-Reg y e-C para los idiomas inglés y español.', 'pt': 'A classificação de emoções é uma nova tarefa que combina várias disciplinas, incluindo Inteligência Artificial e Psicologia, embora o Processamento de Linguagem Natural seja talvez a área mais desafiadora. Neste artigo, descrevemos nossa participação no SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. Em particular, participamos das subtarefas EI-oc, EI-reg e E-c para os idiomas inglês e espanhol.', 'ja': '感情の分類は、人工知能と心理学を含むいくつかの分野を組み合わせた新しいタスクですが、自然言語処理はおそらく最も困難な分野です。本稿では、SemEval -2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweetsへの参加について述べる。特に、英語とスペイン語のEI - oc、EI - reg、E - cサブタスクに参加しています。', 'zh': '情类惟新,人工智能心理学数学科,虽自然语言最具挑战性之域。 本文中,述SemEval-2018 Task1参:推文中。 与英语、西班牙语之EI-oc,EI-reg、E-c之任也。', 'ru': 'Классификация эмоций - это новая задача, которая объединяет несколько дисциплин, включая искусственный интеллект и психологию, хотя обработка естественного языка, пожалуй, является самой сложной областью. В этой статье мы описываем наше участие в задаче SemEval-2018 Task1: Impact in Tweets. В частности, мы принимали участие в подзадачах EI-oc, EI-reg и E-c для английского и испанского языков.', 'hi': 'भावना वर्गीकरण एक नया कार्य है जो आर्टिफिशियल इंटेलिजेंस और मनोविज्ञान सहित कई विषयों को जोड़ता है, हालांकि प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण शायद सबसे चुनौतीपूर्ण क्षेत्र है। इस पेपर में, हम SemEval-2018 Task1 में हमारी भागीदारी का वर्णन करते हैं: Tweets में प्रभाव। विशेष रूप से, हमने अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश भाषाओं के लिए EI-oc, EI-reg और E-c subtasks में भाग लिया है।', 'ga': 'Is tasc nua é rangú mothúcháin a chomhcheanglaíonn go leor disciplíní lena n-áirítear Intleacht Shaorga agus Síceolaíocht, cé gurb í Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha an réimse is dúshlánaí b’fhéidir. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar ár rannpháirtíocht i SemEval-2018 Tasc1: Affect in Tweets. Go háirithe, ghlacamar páirt i bhfothascanna EI-oc, EI-reg agus E-c don Bhéarla agus don Spáinnis.', 'ka': 'ვმოციონის კლასიფიკაცია არის ახალი რაოდენობა, რომელიც კომბინეციური ინტელექციონია და ფოქონოლოგია, თუმცა ჩემი ენერგიის პროცესი შეიძლება შეიძლება ყველაზე გასაკვე ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენი სემEval-2018 რაოდენობაში აღწერეთ ჩვენი დაწყვეტილებას: გავაკეთებთ Tweets-ში. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ დავამწევეთ EI-oc, EI-reg და E-c საკუთრებით ინგლისური და სპანელი ენაზე.', 'el': 'Η ταξινόμηση των συναισθημάτων είναι ένα νέο έργο που συνδυάζει διάφορους κλάδους, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της Τεχνητής Νοημοσύνης και της Ψυχολογίας, αν και η Επεξεργασία Φυσικής Γλώσσας είναι ίσως ο πιο απαιτητικός τομέας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε τη συμμετοχή μας στο Καθήκον: Επίδραση στα tweets. Ειδικότερα, έχουμε συμμετάσχει σε επιμέρους εργασίες για την αγγλική και ισπανική γλώσσα.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmi besorolás egy új feladat, amely több tudományágat ötvöz, beleértve a mesterséges intelligenciát és a pszichológiát, bár a természetes nyelv feldolgozása talán a legnagyobb kihívást jelentő terület. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk, hogy részt vettünk a SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets-ben. Különösen részt vettünk az EI-oc, EI-reg és E-c részfeladatokban angol és spanyol nyelveken.', 'kk': 'Көңіл және психология дегенде бірнеше дисциплинді біріктіретін жаңа тапсырма, бірақ Nature Language Processing - мүмкін, ең көңіл аумағын біріктіреді. Бұл қағазда, біз біздің бірінің бірінші қатынасызды бір-бірінші жылдамдық-2018 тапсырма1: Твиттерде қатынасыз бар. Әрине біз EI-oc, EI-reg және E-c тілдерінің ағылшын және испан тілдеріне қатынасыз келді.', 'it': "La classificazione delle emozioni è un nuovo compito che combina diverse discipline tra cui l'Intelligenza Artificiale e la Psicologia, anche se l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale è forse l'area più impegnativa. In questo articolo descriviamo la nostra partecipazione a SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. In particolare, abbiamo partecipato alle sottoattività EI-oc, EI-reg ed E-c per le lingue inglese e spagnolo.", 'lt': 'Emocijų klasifikacija yra nauja užduotis, kuria derinamos kelios sritys, įskaitant dirbtinę žvalgybą ir psichologiją, nors gamtos kalbų apdorojimas gali būti sunkiausia sritis. Šiame dokumente apibūdiname savo dalyvavimą 2018 m. SemEval uždavinyje1: Poveikis Tweetuose. Visų pirma dalyvavome anglų ir ispanų kalbų EI-oc, EI-reg ir E-c pakraščiuose.', 'mk': 'Emotion classification is a new task that combines several disciplines including Artificial Intelligence and Psychology, although Natural Language Processing is perhaps the most challenging area.  Во овој весник го опишуваме нашето учество во SemEval-2018 задача1: Влијание на Твитови. Посебно, учествувавме во потпрашањата на Ел-Ок, Ел-Рег и Ел-Ц за англиски и шпански јазици.', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi emosi adalah tugas baru yang menggabungkan beberapa disiplin termasuk Intelligence Artificial dan Psychology, walaupun Proses Bahasa Alami mungkin kawasan yang paling mencabar. Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan participasi kami dalam SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. Secara khususnya, kami telah berpartisipasi dalam subtaskan EI-oc, EI-reg dan E-c untuk bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയയാണെങ്കിലും ഒരു പുതിയ ജോലിയായിരിക്കും. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക്1-ല്\u200d വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇ-ഐ-ഒക്ക്, ഇ-റെക്കും ഇ-സി സ്പാനിഷ് ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും ഇ-സി സബ്ട്ടാജുകളില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്', 'mt': 'Il-klassifikazzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet hija kompitu ġdid li jgħaqqad diversi dixxiplini inkluż l-Intelliġenza Artifikali u l-Psikoloġija, għalkemm l-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali huwa forsi l-aktar qasam ta’ sfida. F’dan id-dokument, aħna niddeskrivu l-parteċipazzjoni tagħna f’SemEval-2018 Task1: Affett in Tweets. B’mod partikolari, ipparteċipajna f’sottomistoqsijiet EI-oc, EI-reg u E-c għall-lingwi Ingliżi u Spanjoli.', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja emocji to nowe zadanie łączące kilka dyscyplin, w tym sztuczną inteligencję i psychologię, chociaż przetwarzanie języka naturalnego jest prawdopodobnie najbardziej wymagającym obszarem. W niniejszym artykule opisujemy nasz udział w SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. W szczególności uczestniczyliśmy w podzadaniach EI-oc, EI-reg i E-c dla języków angielskich i hiszpańskich.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн мэдрэмжлийн хуваалтын нэг шинэ ажил нь уран бүтээлч болон сэтгэл зүйн сэтгэл зүйн мэргэжлийг холбоотой. Харин Байгалийн хэл Процесс нь магадгүй хамгийн хэцүү хэсэг юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2018 Task1-д оролцож байгааг тайлбарлаж байна: Tweets-д нөлөөлдөг. Ялангуяа бид EI-oc, EI-reg, E-c хэлний англи, Испан хэлний сургуульд оролцсон.', 'no': 'Emisjonsklassifikasjon er ei ny oppgåve som kombinerer fleire discipliner, inkludert artifisk intelligens og psikopogi, selv om naturspråk-prosessering er kanskje det mest vanskelegste området. I denne papiret beskriver vi vårt deltakast i semiEval-2018 oppgåve1: Etter tweets. I særskilt har vi delta i EI-oc, EI-reg og E-c-underspørsmål for engelsk og spansk språk.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea emoțiilor este o sarcină nouă care combină mai multe discipline, inclusiv inteligența artificială și psihologia, deși procesarea limbajului natural este probabil cea mai provocatoare zonă. În această lucrare, descriem participarea noastră la SemEval-2018 Task1: Afect in Tweets. În special, am participat la subactivitățile EI-oc, EI-reg și E-c pentru limbile engleză și spaniolă.', 'so': 'Emotion classification is a new task that combines several disciplines including Artificial Intelligence and Psychology, although Natural Language Processing is perhaps the most challenging area.  Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa qayb-ka qeybqaadashada SemEval-2018 Task1: Wax ku saabsan Tweets. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ka qeybqaadanay kaalmooyinka EI-oc, EI-reg iyo E-c ee luuqadaha Ingiriis iyo Isbanish.', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija emocija je novi zadatak koji kombinira nekoliko disciplina uključujući umjetnu inteligenciju i psihologiju, iako je proces prirodnog jezika možda najizazovniji područje. U ovom papiru opisujemo naše sudjelovanje u zadatku1 iz polovine Evala-2018: utjecaj na Tweets. Posebno smo učestvovali u podršku EI-oc, EI-reg i E-c za engleski i španjolski jezik.', 'si': 'Emotion classification is a new job that combinates a number of disciples, incl. Articulal Intelligence and psychoscience, though Native language processing is may be the oldest challenged area. මේ පැත්තට, අපි අපේ සම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩේ පාලනය විස්තර කරනවා 1: ට්වීට් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි EI-oc, EI-reg සහ E-c භාෂාව සඳහා ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් භාෂාව සඳහා සමාගත්තා.', 'ta': 'உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தல் ஒரு புதிய செயல் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் செம்Eval-2018 பணியில் எங்கள் பங்கீட்டை விவரிக்கிறோம்: குறிப்பிட்டு, நாங்கள் EI-oc, EI-reg மற்றும் E-c துணை பணிகளில் பங்கிடப்பட்டுள்ளோம் ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் ம', 'sv': 'K瓣nslighetsklassificering 瓣r en ny uppgift som kombinerar flera discipliner inklusive artificiell intelligens och psykologi, 瓣ven om Natural Language Processing kanske 瓣r det mest utmanande omr疇det. I denna uppsats beskriver vi v疇rt deltagande i SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. I synnerhet har vi deltagit i EI-oc, EI-reg och E-c underuppgifter f繹r engelska och spanska spr疇k.', 'ur': 'Emotion classification is a new task that combines several disciplines including Artificial Intelligence and Psychology, although Natural Language Processing may be the most challenging area. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اپنی حضور سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس-۱ میں تقریبا کر دیا ہے: ٹویٹوں میں اثر ہے۔ ہم نے انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی زبانوں کے لئے EI-oc, EI-reg اور E-c subtasks میں مشارک کیا ہے.', 'uz': "Emotion darajasini bir necha disiplar bilan birlashtirish, balki tabiiy tillar jarayonligi eng murakkab bo'lgan holat. Bu hujjatda SemEval-2018 Vazifaning qismlarimizni anglatamiz: Twitterda muammolar. Biz ingliz va ispancha tillari uchun EI-oc, EI-reg va E-c tub vazifalarini o'rganimiz.", 'vi': 'Lớp phân loại cảm xúc là một nhiệm vụ mới kết hợp nhiều lĩnh vực, gồm Trí thông minh nhân tạo và Tâm lý học, mặc dù Phân loại ngôn ngữ tự nhiên có lẽ là khu vực khó khăn nhất. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả sự tham gia của chúng tôi trong nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8: Đặt tác dụng trong Tweet. Chúng tôi đã tham gia c ác yêu cầu ngôn ngữ Anh và Tây Ban Nha.', 'bg': 'Емоционалната класификация е нова задача, която съчетава няколко дисциплини, включително изкуствен интелект и психология, въпреки че естествената езикова обработка е може би най-предизвикателната област. В тази статия описваме нашето участие в Задача 1: Въздействие в туитове. Участвали сме в подзадачите за английски и испански език.', 'nl': 'Emotieclassificatie is een nieuwe taak die verschillende disciplines combineert waaronder Artificial Intelligence en Psychology, hoewel Natural Language Processing misschien wel het meest uitdagende gebied is. In dit artikel beschrijven we onze deelname aan SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. In het bijzonder hebben we deelgenomen aan EI-oc, EI-reg en E-c subtaken voor Engels en Spaans.', 'da': 'Følelsesklassificering er en ny opgave, der kombinerer flere discipliner, herunder kunstig intelligens og psykologi, selvom Natural Language Processing måske er det mest udfordrende område. I denne artikel beskriver vi vores deltagelse i SemEval-2018 Task1: Påvirkning i tweets. Især har vi deltaget i EI-oc, EI-reg og E-c underopgaver for engelsk og spansk sprog.', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija emocija je novi zadatak koji kombinira nekoliko disciplina uključujući umjetnu inteligenciju i psihologiju, iako je proces prirodnog jezika možda najizazovniji područje. U ovom papiru opisujemo naše sudjelovanje u zadatku1 iz polovine Evala-2018: utjecaj na Tweets. Posebno smo učestvovali u podacima EI-oc, EI-reg i E-c za engleski i španjolski jezik.', 'de': 'Die Klassifizierung von Emotionen ist eine neue Aufgabe, die mehrere Disziplinen einschließlich Künstlicher Intelligenz und Psychologie kombiniert, obwohl die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache vielleicht der schwierigste Bereich ist. In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir unsere Beteiligung an SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. Insbesondere haben wir an Teilaufgaben EI-oc, EI-reg und E-c für englische und spanische Sprachen teilgenommen.', 'id': 'Klasifikasi emosi adalah tugas baru yang menggabungkan beberapa disiplin termasuk Intelijen Sendiri dan Psikologi, meskipun Proses Bahasa Alami mungkin adalah area yang paling menantang. Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan participasi kami di SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. Terutama, kami telah berpartisipasi dalam subtasks EI-oc, EI-reg dan E-c untuk bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol.', 'ko': '감정 분류는 인공지능과 심리학 등 여러 학과를 결합한 새로운 임무이다. 비록 자연 언어 처리가 가장 도전적인 분야일 수 있지만.본고에서 우리가SemEval-18 임무1에 참여한 것이 트위터에 미친 영향을 묘사했다.특히 영어와 스페인어의 EI oc, EI reg, E-c 하위 임무에 참여했다.', 'sw': 'Usambazaji wa hisia ni jukumu mpya ambalo linaunganisha maarifa kadhaa ikiwa ni pamoja na Uelelezi wa Kisanaa na Psycholojia, ingawa mchakato wa lugha ya asili huenda ni eneo la changamoto zaidi. Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea ushiriki wetu katika kazi ya SemEval-2018: Inaathiri kwenye twita. Kwa hakika, tumeshiriki katika kazi za EI-oc, EI-reg na Uingereza na Kihispania.', 'tr': 'Duýgy kesişmeleri täze bir täze zadyr, Bir näçe disiplini ýagdaýynda Artificial Intelligence we Psihologiýa bilen birleştirilýär. Tebiýal dil işlemesi belki iň kynçylyk bölegidir. Bu kagyzda, 2018-nji ýyllar bäsleşigini SemEval-2018 Taýgyzynda ýazyp görýäris Özellikle biz EI-oc, EI-reg we E-c dilinde iňlisçe we ispanyýaly diller üçin soraglaryna chikanchasdyk.', 'af': "Emosie klasifikasie is 'n nuwe taak wat verskeie disipline kombinieer, insluitend Artifisiese Inteligensie en Psikologie, alhoewel Natuurlike Taal Prosessering is miskien die mees belangrikste area. In hierdie papier beskrywe ons deelnadering in SemEval-2018 Taak1: Afteken in Tweets. Spesifieke het ons deel in EI-oc, EI-reg en E-c subtaske vir Engels en Spaanse tale.", 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i emocioneve është një detyrë e re që kombinon disa disiplina duke përfshirë Inteligjencën Artifike dhe Psikologjinë, megjithëse Procesimi i Gjuhave Natyrore është ndoshta zona më e vështirë. Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë pjesëmarrjen tonë në SemEval-2018 Task1: Afekt në Tweets. Në veçanti, ne kemi marrë pjesë në nënkërkesat EI-oc, EI-reg dhe E-c për gjuhët angleze dhe spanjolle.', 'am': 'የኢትዮጵያ መግለጫ አዲስ ስራ ነው፤ ምንም እንኳን የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ምናልባት በጣም ታዋቂው ቦታ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የSemEval-2018 ስራዎችን ማግባት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም በEI-oc፣ EI-reg እና ኢ-c ደብዳቤዎችን ለኢንጂልኛ እና ስፓኒሽ ቋንቋዎች ተካፈልን፡፡', 'hy': 'Էմոցիաների դասակարգման նոր խնդիր է, որը համադրում է մի քանի ոլորտներ, ներառյալ արվեստական ինտելեկտությունը և հոգեբանությունը, չնայած որ բնական լեզվի վերլուծումը հավանաբար ամենադժվարն է: In this paper, we describe our participation in SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets.  Մենք հատկապես մասնակցել ենք անգլերեն և իսպանական անգլերեն Է-oc, Է-Reգ և Է-c ենթահարցերին:', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়া সম্ভবত সবচেয়ে চ্যালেঞ্জ এলাকা। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজে অংশগ্রহণের কথা বর্ণনা করছি: টুইটে প্রভাবিত। বিশেষ করে, আমরা ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশ ভাষার জন্য ইআই-অক, ইআই-রেগ এবং ই-c সাবটাসে অংশগ্রহণ করেছি।', 'fa': 'گروه احساسات یک وظیفه جدید است که چندین دسته\u200cای را جمع می\u200cکند که شامل اطلاعات مصنوعی و روانشناسی است، اگرچه پرداخت زبان طبیعی شاید بهترین منطقه\u200cای است. در این کاغذ، ما مشارکت خود را توصیف می\u200cکنیم در ماه\u200cسال-۲۰۱۸: اثر توئیت\u200cها. مخصوصاً ما در زبان\u200cهای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی EI-oc، EI-reg و E-c شرکت کردیم.', 'bs': 'Klasifikacija emocija je novi zadatak koji kombinira nekoliko disciplina uključujući umjetnu inteligenciju i psihologiju, iako je proces prirodnog jezika možda najizazovniji područje. U ovom papiru opisujemo naše sudjelovanje u zadatku1 iz polovine Evala-2018: utjecaj na Tweets. Posebno smo učestvovali u podacima EI-oc, EI-reg i E-c za engleski i španjolski jezik.', 'az': "Emotiyon klasifikasiyasńĪ, sanatlńĪ intelleksi v…ô psikolojiki i√ß…ôrisind…ô bir ne√ß…ô disiplin birl…ôŇüdir…ôn yeni bir iŇüdir. T…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ôsi bel…ô d…ô …ôn √ß…ôtin b√∂lgedir. Bu kańüńĪtda, 2018-ci SemEval-1 Task1: Tweets'l…ôr…ô m√ľvafiq olaraq iŇütirak edirik. √Ėzellikle, biz EI-oc, EI-reg v…ô E-c dill…ôrinin ńįngilizce v…ô ńįspanyol dill…ôrinin subtasklarńĪna katńĪldńĪq.", 'ca': "La classificació emocional és una nova tasca que combina diverses disciplines, incloent la intel·ligència artificial i la psicologia, encara que el processament de llenguatges naturals és potser l'àrea més difícil. En aquest article, descrivim la nostra participació en SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. En particular, hem participat en subtaskes EI-oc, EI-reg i E-c per anglès i espanyol.", 'cs': 'Klasifikace emocí je novým úkolem, který kombinuje několik disciplín včetně umělé inteligence a psychologie, i když zpracování přírodního jazyka je snad nejnáročnější oblastí. V tomto článku popisujeme naši účast na SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets. Konkrétně jsme se podíleli na podúkolech EI-oc, EI-reg a E-c pro anglický a španělský jazyk.', 'fi': 'Tunteiden luokittelu on uusi tehtävä, joka yhdistää useita tieteenaloja, kuten tekoäly ja psykologia, vaikka Luonnollinen kielen käsittely on ehkä haastavin alue. Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme osallistumistamme SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets -ohjelmaan. Olemme osallistuneet erityisesti englannin ja espanjan kielen EI-oc-, EI-reg- ja E-c-alatehtäviin.', 'et': 'Emotsioonide klassifitseerimine on uus ülesanne, mis ühendab mitmeid erialasid, sealhulgas tehisintellekti ja psühholoogia, kuigi looduslik keele töötlemine on ehk kõige keerulisem valdkond. Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldame oma osalemist SemEval-2018 ülesandes 1: mõju tweetides. Eelkõige oleme osalenud EI-oc, EI-reg ja E-c alamülesannetes inglise ja hispaania keeles.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé kesalasi sistem sing nggawe akeh dilané sing sampeyan karo Awak dhéwé karo Pesongalasi, soalé Terus Sak Jawisan sing paling apik dhéwé. Nan uwis-uwis rambaran wigatining kita nyenengaké ning semebal-2008 task 1: AfEffect in Two Mancul-Mancul, kéné iso ngubah sing nyebutaké ning II-ok, eI-Reg lan E-c kang basa Inggris lan pitik.', 'he': 'מסווג רגשות הוא משימה חדשה שמשולבת מספר משמעות כולל מודיעין אמיתי ופסיכולוגיה, למרות שעבודת שפת טבעית היא אולי האזור הכי מאתגר. In this paper, we describe our participation in SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets.  במיוחד, השתתפנו בשאלות EI-oc, EI-reg ואי-c לאנגלית וספרדית.', 'sk': 'Klasifikacija čustev je nova naloga, ki združuje več disciplin, vključno z umetno inteligenco in psihologijo, čeprav je obdelava naravnega jezika morda najbolj zahtevno področje. V tem prispevku opisujemo naše sodelovanje v nalogi SemEval-2018: Vpliv v tweets. Predvsem smo sodelovali pri podnalogah EI-oc, EI-reg in E-c za angleške in španske jezike.', 'ha': 'Classification of Email is a new job that integrates several disciplines, include the Babbar Inteligence and Psyokolojiya, kuma kõ da yaushe, Pergala shi ne mafi tsananin gaura. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana ushurinmu na SemEV-2018 Taƙon 1: Ina Gani a cikin Twitter. Haƙĩƙa, mun haɗa cikin masu aikin EI-oc, EI-reg da e-c cikin harshen Ingiriya da Isbanish.', 'bo': 'སེམས་བརྗོད་དབྱེ་བ་ནི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་དང་ལས་འཆར་མཐུན་ན། རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་མཁན་ཤོས་ཏ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་(SemEval-2018)རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ནང་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ནང་དུ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་EI-oc, EI-reg་དང་E-c སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཕྱི་ཚིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་ལ་ཞུགས་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : EvoMSA and TC for Sentiment Analysis', 'ar': 'INGEOTEC في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: EvoMSA و μTC لتحليل المشاعر', 'es': 'INGEOTEC en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: eVOMSA y μTC para el análisis de sentimientos', 'pt': 'INGEOTEC na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: EvoMSA e μTC para Análise de Sentimentos', 'fr': "INGEOTEC au SemEVAL-2018 Task 1\xa0: eVOMSA et μTC pour l'analyse des sentiments", 'ja': 'SEMEval -2018のINGEOTECタスク1 ： EvoMSAとセンチメント分析のためのμ TC', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर INGEOTEC: भावना विश्लेषण के लिए EvoMSA और μTC', 'ru': 'INGEOTEC на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: EvoMSA и μTC для анализа настроений', 'zh': 'INGEOTECňťĘSemEval-2018ňŐí1:ŠâůŠ×ÉEvoMSA╬╝TC', 'ga': 'INGEOTEC ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: EvoMSA agus μTC le haghaidh Anailís Mothúchán', 'hu': 'INGEOTEC a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: EvoMSA és TC az érzelmek elemzésére', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: και TC για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων', 'kk': 'INGEOTEC 1- шегінші тапсырма: EvoMSA және TC Sentiment Analysis үшін', 'mk': 'ИНГЕОТЕК на SemEval-2018 задача 1: EvoMSA и TC за анализа на чувствата', 'ka': 'INGEOTEC SemEval-2018 დავალება 1: EvoMSA და TC Sentiment Analysis', 'ms': 'INGEOTEC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: EvoMSA dan TC untuk Analisi Sentiment', 'it': "INGEOTEC al SemEval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA e TC per l'analisi dei sentimenti", 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1: എവോഎസ്എയും സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം', 'lt': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA and  TC for Sentiment Analysis', 'mn': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA and − TC for Sentiment Analysis', 'pl': 'INGEOTEC na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: EvoMSA i TC do analizy sentymentów', 'no': 'INGEOTEC ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: EvoMSA og TC for Sentiment Analysis', 'ro': 'INGEOTEC la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: EvoMSA și TC pentru Analiza Sentimentelor', 'sr': 'INGEOTEC na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: EvoMSA i TC za analizu sentimenta', 'si': 'INGEOTECT at Half-2018 Job 1: EvoMSA and  TC for Sentiment විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2018 INGEOTEC', 'mt': 'INGEOTEC f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: EvoMSA u TC għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment', 'sv': 'INGEOTEC på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: EvoMSA och TC för känselanalys', 'ur': 'سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں INGEOTEC: EvoMSA اور سی سی سنٹیمنٹ تحلیل کے لئے', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 செயல் 1: EvoMSA மற்றும் உணர்வு விளக்க TC', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 vazifa 1: Sentiment Analysis uchun EvoMSA va TC', 'vi': 'ĐẠI HIỆP SĨ ROBIN', 'nl': 'INGEOTEC op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: EvoMSA en TC voor Sentiment Analysis', 'da': 'INGEOTEC på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: EvoMSA og TC til følelsesanalyse', 'de': 'INGEOTEC auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: EvoMSA und TC zur Sentimentanalyse', 'bg': 'Задача 1: ЕвоМСА и ТС за анализ на сентимента', 'hr': 'INGEOTEC na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: EvoMSA i TC za sentimentnu analizu', 'ko': 'INGEOTEC가SemEval-18에서의 임무 1: 정서 분석의 EvoMSA와 TC', 'fa': 'INGEOTEC در پایین Eval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA و TC for Sentiment Analysis', 'sw': 'INGEOTEC katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: EvoMSA na TC kwa Uchambuzi wa Seneti', 'id': 'INGEOTEC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: EvoMSA dan TC untuk Analisi Sentiment', 'sq': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA and  TC for Sentiment Analysis', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'tr': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA and  TCfor Sentiment Analysis', 'af': 'INGEOTEC by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: EvoMSA en TC vir Sentiment Analysis', 'hy': 'Ինջեոտեքսը ՍեմԷվալ 2018 թվականի առաջին հանձնարարությունում՝ ԵվոՄՍԱ և ԹԿ զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար', 'az': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA and “ Sentiment Analysis for TC', 'bn': "সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১: EvoMSA এবং 'টিসি' সেন্টিমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য", 'ca': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA and  TC for Sentiment Analysis', 'cs': 'INGEOTEC na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: EvoMSA a TC pro analýzu sentimentů', 'et': 'INGEOTEC SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: EvoMSA ja TC tunnete analüüsi jaoks', 'fi': 'INGEOTEC SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: EvoMSA ja TC tunteiden analysointiin', 'bs': 'INGEOTEC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: EvoMSA i TC za analizu sentimenta', 'jv': 'INGEOC at semi-2020 task 1: evoo msA and   T for Sentiment Test', 'he': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA and  TC for Sentiment Analysis', 'sk': 'INGEOTEC na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: EvoMSA in TC za analizo sentimenta', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: EvoMSA and  TC for Sentiment Analysis'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our participation in Affective Tweets task for emotional intensity and sentiment intensity subtasks for English, Spanish, and Arabic languages. We used two approaches, TC and EvoMSA. The first one is a generic text categorization and regression system ; and the second one, a two-stage architecture for Sentiment Analysis. Both approaches are multilingual and domain independent.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa participação na tarefa Tweets Afetivos para subtarefas de intensidade emocional e intensidade de sentimento para os idiomas inglês, espanhol e árabe. Usamos duas abordagens, μTC e EvoMSA. O primeiro é um sistema genérico de categorização e regressão de textos; e a segunda, uma arquitetura de dois estágios para Análise de Sentimentos. Ambas as abordagens são multilíngues e independentes de domínio.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestra participación en la tarea de Tweets afectivos para las subtareas de intensidad emocional e intensidad de sentimiento para los idiomas inglés, español y árabe. Utilizamos dos enfoques, μTC y eVomSA. El primero es un sistema genérico de categorización y regresión de texto; y el segundo, una arquitectura de dos etapas para el análisis de sentimientos. Ambos enfoques son multilingües e independientes del dominio.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركتنا في مهمة التغريدات المؤثرة من أجل المهام الفرعية للكثافة العاطفية وكثافة المشاعر للغات الإنجليزية والإسبانية والعربية. استخدمنا طريقتين ، μTC و EvoMSA. الأول هو تصنيف النص العام ونظام الانحدار. والثاني ، بنية من مرحلتين لتحليل المشاعر. كلا النهجين متعدد اللغات ومستقل عن المجال.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre participation à la tâche Tweets affectifs pour les sous-tâches relatives à l'intensité émotionnelle et à l'intensité des sentiments pour les langues anglaise, espagnole et arabe. Nous avons utilisé deux approches, μTC et eVOMSA. Le premier est un système de catégorisation et de régression de texte générique\xa0; et le second, une architecture en deux étapes pour l'analyse des sentiments. Les deux approches sont multilingues et indépendantes du domaine.", 'zh': '本文引我于情推文之任,及于英语、西班牙语、阿拉伯语之情强度子。 吾用二法,μTC与EvoMSA。 一曰通用文本分类及归系统。 二曰情析两体系结构。 此二者,皆多言独立于域也。', 'ja': 'この論文では、英語、スペイン語、アラビア語の感情の強さと感情の強さのサブタスクのための感情的ツイートタスクへの参加について説明します。μ TCとEvoMSAの2つのアプローチを使用した。1つ目は一般的なテキスト分類と回帰システムで、2つ目はセンチメント分析のための2段階のアーキテクチャです。どちらのアプローチも多言語であり、ドメインに依存しない。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अंग्रेजी, स्पेनिश और अरबी भाषाओं के लिए भावनात्मक तीव्रता और भावना तीव्रता उपकार्यों के लिए भावात्मक ट्वीट्स कार्य में हमारी भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है। हमने दो दृष्टिकोणों का उपयोग किया, μTC और EvoMSA। पहला एक सामान्य पाठ वर्गीकरण और प्रतिगमन प्रणाली है; और दूसरा, भावना विश्लेषण के लिए एक दो-चरण वास्तुकला। दोनों दृष्टिकोण बहुभाषी और डोमेन स्वतंत्र हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наше участие в задаче Affective Tweets для подзадач эмоциональной интенсивности и интенсивности чувств для английского, испанского и арабского языков. Мы использовали два подхода, μTC и EvoMSA. Первая представляет собой общую систему категоризации и регрессии текста, а вторая - двухэтапную архитектуру для анализа сентиментов. Оба подхода являются многоязычными и не зависят от домена.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár rannpháirtíocht sa tasc Affective Tweets le haghaidh déine mhothúchánach agus fo-tascanna déine meon do Bhéarla, Spáinnis agus Araibis. D’úsáideamar dhá chur chuige, μTC agus EvoMSA. Is córas cineálach catagóirithe agus aischéimnithe téacs é an chéad cheann; agus an dara ceann, ailtireacht dhá chéim le haghaidh Anailís Mothúchán. Tá an dá chur chuige ilteangach agus neamhspleách ar an bhfearann.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή μας στην εργασία για συναισθηματική ένταση και ένταση συναισθημάτων για τις αγγλικές, ισπανικές και αραβικές γλώσσες. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε δύο προσεγγίσεις, TC και EvoMSA. Το πρώτο είναι ένα γενικό σύστημα κατηγοριοποίησης κειμένου και παλινδρόμησης. και το δεύτερο, μια αρχιτεκτονική δύο σταδίων για την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων. Και οι δύο προσεγγίσεις είναι πολυγλωσσικές και ανεξάρτητες από τομείς.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az Affective Tweets feladatban való részvételünket az angol, spanyol és arab nyelvekre vonatkozó érzelmi intenzitással és érzelmi intenzitással kapcsolatos alterületekkel kapcsolatban. Két megközelítést használtunk, TC és EvoMSA. Az első egy általános szövegkategorizálási és regressziós rendszer; és a második, egy kétlépcsős architektúra az érzelmek elemzéséhez. Mindkét megközelítés többnyelvű és területfüggetlen.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს ჩვენი მონაწილეობა აფექტიური Tweets-ში ემოციონალური ინტენსტიური და სენტიმენტიური ინტენსტიური საშუალებაზე ინგლისური, სპანელი და აპაბ ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ ორი მიღება, TC და EvoMSA. პირველი არის საერთო ტექსტის კატეგორიზაცია და რეგრესი სისტემი; და მეორე, სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის ორ ფაეჯის აქტიქტიქტურა. ორივე მიღება მრავალენგური და დიომინის განსაზღვრებელია.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ағылшын, испан және араб тілдерінің ағылшын, испан және ағылшын тілдер үшін эмоциялық теңдік және сезімдік теңдік тапсырмасына қатынасызды таңда Біз екі жағдай қолдандық, TC және EvoMSA. Біріншісі - жалпы мәтін санаттарын және регрессия жүйесі. Екіншісі - Sentiment Analysis архитектурасы. Екі жағдай - көп тілді және доменге тәуелсіз.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų dalyvavimas paveiktų Tweetų darbe dėl emocinio intensyvumo ir jausmų intensyvumo subtaskai anglų, ispanų ir arabų kalbomis. Naudojome du metodus: TC ir EvoMSA. Pirmasis yra bendra tekstų kategorijizacijos ir regresijos sistema; ir antroji – dviejų etapų jautrumo analizės architektūra. Abu metodai yra daugiakalbiai ir nepriklausomi nuo sričių.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашето учество во задачата на Афективните Твитови за емоционален интензитет и чувствителен интензитет потпрашања за англиски, шпански и арапски јазици. Користевме два пристапи, ТЦ и ЕвоМСА. Првата е генерална категоризација на текст и регресен систем; и втората, двофаза архитектура за анализа на чувствата. Двајцата пристапи се мултијазични и независни од доменот.', 'ml': 'This paper describes our participation in Affective Tweets task for emotional intensity and sentiment intensity subtasks for English, Spanish, and Arabic languages.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് വഴികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു, ടിസിയും എവോഎസ്എയും. ആദ്യത്തെ ഒരു സാധാരണ പദാവലിയുടെ വിഭാഗവും വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റമാണ്; രണ്ടാമത്തെ ഒന്ന്, സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം വേണ്ടി രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജ് ആര്\u200dക്കിക്കറ്റര്\u200d. രണ്ടുപേരും പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളും ഡൊമെയിനും സ്വാതന്ത്രമാണ്.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra partecipazione al compito Affective Tweets per l'intensità emotiva e l'intensità sentimentale sottotask per le lingue inglese, spagnolo e arabo. Abbiamo usato due approcci, TC ed EvoMSA. Il primo è un sistema generico di categorizzazione e regressione del testo; e la seconda, un'architettura a due stadi per l'analisi dei sentimenti. Entrambi gli approcci sono multilingue e indipendenti dal dominio.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөл, Англи, Испан, Араб хэлний тухай бидний оролцоог тайлбарладаг. Бид TC болон EvoMSA хоёр арга зам ашигласан. Эхний нь ерөнхий текст хуваарилалт болон регрессийн систем юм. Хоёр дахь, Sentiment Analysis-ын хоёр дахь архитектур. Хоёр талаар нь олон хэл болон холбоотой хамааралтай.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vårt deltakelse i effektiv tweets-oppgåva for emosjonell intensitet og sentimentintensitet for engelsk, spansk og arabisk språk. Vi brukte to tilnærmingar, TC og EvoMSA. Den første er ein generiske tekstkategorisering og regresjonssystem. og den andre, ein to-stadsarkitektur for Sentiment Analysis. Begge tilnærmingar er fleire språk og domene uavhengig.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz udział w zadaniu dotyczącym intensywności emocjonalnej i intensywności sentymentów dla języków angielskich, hiszpańskich i arabskich. Zastosowaliśmy dwa podejścia, TC i EvoMSA. Pierwszym z nich jest ogólny system kategoryzacji tekstu i regresji; A drugi, dwustopniowa architektura analizy sentymentów. Oba podejścia są wielojęzyczne i niezależne od domeny.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie participarea noastră la sarcina Tweets afective pentru intensitatea emoțională și intensitatea sentimentelor subactivități pentru limbile engleză, spaniolă și arabă. Am folosit două abordări, TC și EvoMSA. Primul este un sistem generic de categorizare și regresie a textului; şi a doua, o arhitectură în două etape pentru Analiza Sentimentelor. Ambele abordări sunt multilingve și independente de domeniu.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u zadatku Afektivnih Tweets za emocionalnu intenzitet i sentimentalnu intenzitet suptrake za engleski, španjolski i arapski jezik. Koristili smo dva pristupa, TC i EvoMSA. Prvi je generički tekst kategorizacija i regresijski sistem; Druga, arhitektura za analizu sentimenta. Obje pristupe su multijezički i domena nezavisni.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan participasi kita dalam tugas Affective Tweets untuk intensiti emosi dan intensiti perasaan subtaskan untuk bahasa Inggeris, Sepanyol, dan Arab. Kami menggunakan dua pendekatan, TC dan EvoMSA. The first one is a generic text categorization and regression system;  dan yang kedua, arkitektur dua tahap untuk Analisi Sentiment. Kedua-dua pendekatan berbilang bahasa dan bebas domain.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සම්පූර්ණ ට්විට් එක්ක භාවිතාවක් සහ භාවිතාවක් සඳහා භාවිත විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනය දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා, TC සහ EvoMSA. පළමුවෙනි එක තමයි සාමාන්\u200dය පාළුව ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතිය සහ ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතිය; දෙවෙනි එකක්, Sentiment විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ස්ථානය දෙකක් විස්තාරයක්. දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සහ ඩෝමින් ස්වයංගයක්.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-parteċipazzjoni tagħna fit-Tweets Affettivi għal subtasks għall-intensità emozzjonali u l-intensità tas-sentimenti għall-lingwi Ingliżi, Spanjoli u Għarab. Użajna żewġ approċċi, TC u EvoMSA. L-ewwel waħda hija sistema ġenerika ta’ kategorizzazzjoni u rigressjoni tat-test; u t-tieni, arkitettura f’żewġ stadji għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment. Iż-żewġ approċċi huma multilingwi u indipendenti mid-dominju.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt deltagande i Affective Tweets uppgift för känslomässig intensitet och känslointensitet subaktiviteter för engelska, spanska och arabiska språk. Vi använde oss av två metoder, TC och EvoMSA. Den första är ett generiskt textkategoriserings- och regressionssystem. och den andra, en tvåstegs arkitektur för Sentiment Analysis. Båda tillvägagångssätten är flerspråkiga och domänoberoende.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாங்கள் பாக்கியமான Tweets பணியில் எங்கள் பகிர்ந்து குறிப்பிடுகிறது உணர்வு உயரம் மற்றும் உணர்வு உயரமான துணை பணிகள TC மற்றும் EvoMSA இரண்டு முறைகளை பயன்படுத்தினோம். முதலில் ஒரு பொதுவான உரை வகுத்தல் மற்றும் திரும்ப அமைப்பு; இரண்டாவது ஒரு நேரத்திற்கான இரண்டு நிலை ஆய்வு இரண்டு அணுகுகளும் பல மொழி மற்றும் உள்ளூர் சுதந்திரமாக உள்ளன.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran qayb ka qaadashada shaqadeenna Affective Tweets oo loogu talagalay xeerarka dhaqdhaqaalaha iyo fikrada guud ee luuqadaha Ingiriis, Isbanish iyo Carabi. Waxaannu isticmaalnay laba qaab, TC iyo EvoMSA. Kii ugu horreeya waa nidaamka qoraalka ee geneeral ku qeybinta iyo dib u celinta; Mida labaadna, xarunta labaad ee baaraandegista sanad. Dhaqdhaqaaqa labaduba waa mid xor ah oo luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo gudaha.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری مشارکت کے ٹیوٹ کے تابع میں مشارکت کرتا ہے جو احساساتی تنگی اور احساسات تنگی کے لئے انگلیسی, اسپانیایی اور عربی زبانوں کے لئے مشارکت ہے۔ ہم نے دو طریقے استعمال کیا، TC اور EvoMSA. سب سے پہلے ایک جسمانی ٹکسٹ کاٹی سیستم ہے۔ اور دوسرا، Sentiment Analysis کے لئے ایک دومرحلہ معماری۔ دونوں تقریبا بہت سی زبان اور ڈومین بے نیاز ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz Affektiv Twitterdan ishlashimizni anglatadi, engliz, ispanchaga, va arab tilga hisob qilish imkoniyatlarimizni anglatadi. Biz ikkita usuldan foydalanamiz, TC va EvoMSA. Birinchi birinchi birinchi matn kattalashtirish va boshqarish tizimi. Ikkinchi narsa, Sent Analysi uchun ikki darajada arxituvchi. Ikkita tillar va domen qo'llanmalari.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả sự tham gia của chúng ta trong nhiệm vụ Năm Dương Báo về cường cảm xúc và cường độ cảm xúc phụ đề ngôn ngữ Anh, Tây Ban Nha và A Rập. Chúng tôi sử dụng hai phương pháp, TC và EvodMSA. Cái thứ nhất là hệ thống phân loại văn bản và phục hồi. và một, một kiến trúc hai tầng cho phiên bản phân tích. Cả hai phương pháp là độc lập đa dạng và miền.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашето участие в задачата за емоционална интензивност и интензивност на сантиментални подзадачи за английски, испански и арабски езици. Използвахме два подхода, TC и EvoMSA. Първата е обща текстова категоризация и регресионна система; А втората - двустепенна архитектура за анализ на чувствата. И двата подхода са многоезични и независими от областта.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores deltagelse i Affective Tweets opgave for følelsesmæssig intensitet og følelsesintensitet underopgaver for engelsk, spansk og arabisk sprog. Vi brugte to metoder, TC og EvoMSA. Den første er et generisk tekstkategoriserings- og regressionssystem; og den anden, en to-trins arkitektur til følelsesanalyse. Begge tilgange er flersprogede og domæneafhængige.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft onze deelname aan Affectieve Tweets taak voor emotionele intensiteit en sentimentintensiteit subtaken voor Engelse, Spaanse en Arabische talen. We gebruikten twee benaderingen, TC en EvoMSA. De eerste is een generiek tekstcategorisatie- en regressiesysteem; En de tweede, een tweetraps architectuur voor Sentiment Analysis. Beide benaderingen zijn meertalig en domeinonafhankelijk.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt unsere Teilnahme an Affektive Tweets Aufgabe für emotionale Intensität und Sentiment Intensität Subtasks für Englisch, Spanisch und Arabisch Sprachen. Wir verwendeten zwei Ansätze, TC und EvoMSA. Das erste ist ein generisches Textkategorisierungs- und Regressionssystem; und die zweite, eine zweistufige Architektur für Sentiment Analysis. Beide Ansätze sind mehrsprachig und domänenunabhängig.', 'id': 'This paper describes our participation in Affective Tweets task for emotional intensity and sentiment intensity subtasks for English, Spanish, and Arabic languages.  Kami menggunakan dua pendekatan, TC dan EvoMSA. The first one is a generic text categorization and regression system;  dan yang kedua, arsitektur dua tahap untuk Analisi Sentiment. Both approaches are multilingual and domain independent.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت ما را توضیح می\u200cدهد که در وظیفه\u200cی توئیت\u200cهای تاثیر و تاثیر احساسات برای زبان\u200cهای انگلیسی، اسپانیایی و عربی شرکت می\u200cکنند. ما از دو دسترسی استفاده کردیم، TC و EvoMSA. اولین یک دستگاه متن ژنرال و سیستم بازگشت است. و دومین، یک معماری دو مرحله برای تحلیل سنتی. هر دو دسترسی بسیار زبان و دومین مستقل هستند.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ushiriki wetu katika kazi yetu ya Twita yenye ufanisi wa hisia na mitazamo ya kuongezeka kwa lugha za Kiingereza, Kihispania na Kiarabu. Tulitumia mbili, TC na EvoMSA. Kila kwanza ni unyanyasaji wa maandishi ya kawaida na mfumo wa ukandamizaji; and the second one, a two-stage architecture for Sentiment Analysis.  mbili mbili ni lugha mbalimbali na ndani huru.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u zadatku Afektivnih Tweets za emocionalnu intenzitet i intenzitet osjećanja poduzeća na engleski, španjolski i arapski jezici. Koristili smo dva pristupa, TC i EvoMSA. Prvi je generički tekst kategorizacija i regresijski sustav; a drugi, dvije faze arhitekture za analizu sentimenta. Obje pristupe su multijezički i domena nezavisni.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň nähili güýçli Tweets täzeliklerimizi duýgular güýçli we duýgular kynçylyklaryň Iňlisçe, Ispanýolça we Arapça dillerimize paýlaşýar. Biz iki golaý ulandyk, TC we EvoMSA. Ilkinji metin kategoriýasy we regresmi sistemi; iň. Ikinji bolsa Sentiment Analizi üçin iki sahypa arhitektura. Her ikisi de çok dilli ve domena bağımsızdır.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons deelnimmering in Affective Tweets taak vir emosionele intensiteit en sentiment intensiteit ondersteun vir Engels, Spaanse en Arabse tale. Ons het twee toegang gebruik, TC en EvoMSA. Die eerste een is 'n algemene teks kategorisasie en regresasie stelsel; en die tweede een, 'n twee-stadige arkitektuur vir Sentiment Analysis. Beide toegang is multilinglike en domein onveilig.", 'ko': '본고는 우리가 감정 추문 임무에 참여하는 상황을 묘사하는데 영어, 스페인어와 아랍어의 감정 강도와 감정 강도 서브 임무를 포함한다.우리는 TC와 EvoMSA 두 가지 방법을 사용했다.첫 번째는 유니버설 텍스트 분류와 회귀 시스템이다.두 번째는 정서 분석의 두 단계 구조다.이 두 가지 방법은 모두 다언어와 영역에 독립된 것이다.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በአፍሪካዊ ትዊተሮች ላይ ተግባራችንን እና የኢንጂል፣ ስፓኒሽ እና ዐረብኛ ቋንቋዎች ለማስታወቂያው ስብስብ ስብሰባችንን ይናገራል፡፡ ሁለት ደረጃዎች፣ TC እና EvoMSA የመጀመሪያው የጽሑፍ መለያየት እና አስተካክል ስርዓት ነው ሁለተኛውም ፣ ለሳንተርኔት Analysis የሁለት ደረጃ መሠረት ። ሁለታቸው የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎችና የውስጥ ነፃ ናቸው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր մասնակցությունը Աֆեկտիվ Թվիթերի խնդիրներում էմոցիոնալ ինտենսիվության և զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության ենթախնդիրների համար անգլերեն, իսպաներեն և արաբերեն: We used two approaches,  TC and EvoMSA.  Առաջինը ընդհանուր տեքստի կատեգորիզացիայի և ռեգրեսիայի համակարգ է, և երկրորդը՝ զգացմունքների վերլուծության երկու փուլում գտնվող ճարտարապետություն: Both approaches are multilingual and domain independent.', 'bn': 'This paper describes our participation in Affective Tweets task for emotional intensity and sentiment intensity subtasks for English, Spanish, and Arabic languages.  আমরা দুটি উপায় ব্যবহার করেছি, টিসি এবং ইভোমেসা। প্রথমটি একটি সাধারণ টেক্সট বিভাগ এবং পুনরাবৃত্তি সিস্টেম; আর দ্বিতীয়, সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য একটি দুই-মাত্রা আর্কিকেট। উভয় প্রতিক্রিয়া মাল্টিভাষা এবং ডোমেইন স্বাধীন।', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la nostra participació en la tasca d'Affective Tweets per la intensitat emocional i la intensitat sentimental subtaskes per anglès, espanyol i àrab. We used two approaches,  TC and EvoMSA.  La primera és una categorització genèrica de textos i sistema de regressió; and the second one, a two-stage architecture for Sentiment Analysis.  Ambdós enfocaments són multillengües i independents de dominis.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje naši účast na úkolu Affective Tweets pro emocionální intenzitu a intenzitu sentimentu pro anglický, španělský a arabský jazyk. Použili jsme dva přístupy, TC a EvoMSA. První z nich je obecný systém kategorizace textu a regresní systém; A druhý, dvoustupňová architektura pro analýzu sentimentů. Oba přístupy jsou vícejazyčné a doménově nezávislé.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie osalemist emotsionaalse intensiivsuse ja sentimentaalse intensiivsuse alamülesannetes Affective Tweets inglise, hispaania ja araabia keeles. Me kasutasime kahte lähenemisviisi, TC ja EvoMSA. Esimene neist on üldine teksti kategooriate ja regressioonisüsteem; Ja teine, kaheastmeline arhitektuur Sentiment Analysis. Mõlemad lähenemisviisid on mitmekeelsed ja valdkonnasõltumatud.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan osallistumista Affective Tweets -tehtävään emotionaalisen intensiteetin ja tunteiden intensiteetin alitehtäviin englannin, espanjan ja arabian kielillä. Käytimme kahta lähestymistapaa, TC ja EvoMSA. Ensimmäinen on yleinen tekstin luokittelu- ja regressiojärjestelmä. Ja toinen, kaksivaiheinen arkkitehtuuri Sentiment Analysis. Molemmat lähestymistavat ovat monikielisiä ja toimialoista riippumattomia.', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt, emosiyal Ňüidd…ôtli v…ô hissl…ôr Ňüidd…ôtli hissl…ôrin ńįngilizce, ńįspanyolca v…ô Arap√ßa dill…ôrinin istifad…ô edilm…ôsini t…ôsdiql…ôyir. Biz TC v…ô EvoMSA iki yaxńĪnlńĪq kullandńĪq. ∆Źvv…ôlki m…ôtn kategoriyasiyasńĪ v…ô regresiya sistemidir; ńįkincisi, Sentiment Analizi √ľ√ß√ľn iki d…ôf…ô arhitekt√ľr. ńįkisi d…ô √ßoxlu dil v…ô domena bańüńĪmsńĪzdńĪr.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u zadatku Afektivnih Tweets za emocionalnu intenzitet i intenzitet osjećanja poduzeća na engleski, španjolski i arapski jezici. Koristili smo dva pristupa, TC i EvoMSA. Prvi je generički tekst kategorizacija i regresijski sistem; a druga, arhitektura za analizu sentimenta. Obje pristupe su multijezički i domena nezavisni.', 'sq': 'This paper describes our participation in Affective Tweets task for emotional intensity and sentiment intensity subtasks for English, Spanish, and Arabic languages.  We used two approaches,  TC and EvoMSA.  I pari është një kategorizim gjeneral teksti dhe sistemi i regresionit; and the second one, a two-stage architecture for Sentiment Analysis.  Të dy qasjet janë shumëgjuhëse dhe të pavarura në domeni.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambarang nggambar punika ingkang éntuk ning Mbit Akèh Afffeksi kanggo nggambar kelas karo kapan langkung sampeyan ingkang, Kasipan lan ingkang arap. Awak dhéwé ngegambar pawaran durus, ték, ték, karo ETOSMA. Awak dhéwé sing paling kelas teks kategorisi lan sistem régleksi; dhéwé lan kabeh tanggal, architecture ramu kelas dhuwur kanggo Sentiment Test. Sampeyan kabèh-sampeyan bungan akeh luwih lan gambar dipun-sampeyan.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana ushinanmu a cikin aikin Affective Twitter wa masu aikin hisia'a da kashi na saurari cikin harshen Ingiriya, Isbanish da Larabci. Mun yi amfani da matsayi biyu, TC da evaoM. Kila na farko yana da wata katori na matsayin daban; da na farko, an sami matsayin fasa biyu zuwa Analyza na Saukar. Dukan kowansu na kamfata mulki da guda ne.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naše sodelovanje v nalogi Affective Tweets za čustveno intenzivnost in intenzivnost sentimentalnih podopravil za angleški, španski in arabski jezik. Uporabili smo dva pristopa, TC in EvoMSA. Prvi je splošni sistem kategorizacije in regresije besedila; Druga pa dvostopenjska arhitektura za analizo čustev. Oba pristopa sta večjezična in neodvisna od področja.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את השתתפות שלנו בטוויטים אפקטיביים משימה לאינטנסיביות רגשית ואינטנסיביות רגשות השתמשנו בשני גישות, TC ו EvoMSA. הראשון הוא קטגוריזציה טקסטית גנרלית ומערכת מחזור. והשנייה, ארכיטקטורה בשתי שלבים לניתוח רגשות. שני גישות הן רבות שפות ולא עצמאות בתחום.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མིན་ཐག་གི་ ཨིན་ཇིའི་དང་ སེར་སྐད་དང་ ཨ་རིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་། ང་ཚོས་(TC)དང་། EvoMSA གཟུགས་གཟུགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་པ་ཡིན། དང་པོ་དེ་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་བསྡུས་ཐབས་མ་ལག་ཅིག་རེད། དང་པོ་གཉིས་པ། Sentiment Analysis ཡི་སྒྲུང་བརྗོད་ཐོག་གི་བཟོ་བཀོད་གཉིས་པ་རེད། སྐད་རིགས་དང་དྲ་བ་གཉིས་པོ་སྣང་མེད་པར་ཐད་ཆེ་བ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Preprocessing Impact on Multi-label Emotion Classification', 'ar': 'Tw-StAR في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: تأثير المعالجة المسبقة على تصنيف العاطفة متعدد العلامات', 'es': 'TW-Star en la Tarea 1 de SemeVal-2018: Impacto del preprocesamiento en la clasificación de emociones multietiqueta', 'pt': 'Tw-StAR na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Impacto do pré-processamento na classificação de emoções multirrótulo', 'fr': 'TW-Star au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Impact du prétraitement sur la classification des émotions multi-étiquettes', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のTw - Starタスク1 ：マルチラベル感情分類への事前処理の影響', 'zh': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2018 务1:预处理多情类', 'ru': 'Tw-StAR на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Влияние предварительной обработки на многоуровневую классификацию эмоций', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर Tw-STAR: बहु-लेबल भावना वर्गीकरण पर प्रीप्रोसेसिंग प्रभाव', 'ga': 'Tw-StAR ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Tionchar a Réamhphróiseáil ar Aicmiú Mothúcháin Illipéid', 'hu': 'Tw-StAR a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Az előfeldolgozás hatása a többcímkés érzelmi osztályozásra', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Αποτέλεσμα προεπεξεργασίας στην ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων πολλαπλών ετικετών', 'lt': 'Tw-StAR per 2018 m. pusmetį 1 užduotis: Išankstinis apdorojimo poveikis daugiametei emocijos klasifikacijai', 'it': 'Tw-StAR a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Impatto di pre-elaborazione sulla classificazione delle emozioni multi-etichetta', 'ms': 'Tw-StAR pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Preproses Impact on Multi-label Emotion Classification', 'kk': 'Бірнеше жарлық көңіл көңіл көңіл классификациясындағы 2- Старт 1- тапсырмасында:', 'mt': 'Tw-StAR f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Impatt ta’ Preipproċessar fuq il-Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Emożizzjoni b’Multitikketta', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Олон-label Emotion Classification', 'ka': 'Tw- StAR semiEval- 2018 დავალება 1: მრავალური ელემოციის კლასიფიკაციაზე გადაწყენება', 'pl': 'Tw-StAR w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Wpływ wstępnego przetwarzania na klasyfikację emocji wieloznakowych', 'ro': 'Tw-StAR la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Impactul prelucrării prealabile asupra clasificării emoțiilor multietice', 'mk': 'Name', 'si': '2- StAR at Half- 2018 Job 1: pre-processing Impact on Multi- label Emotion Classified', 'so': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Preprocessing Impact on Multi-label Emotion Classification', 'sv': 'Tw-StAR p책 SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: F철rbehandling Effekt p책 flerm채rkningsklassificering av k채nslor', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் இருநிலை', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1: Multi- label Emotion Classification', 'no': 'Tw- StAR på halvEval- 2018 oppgåve 1: Førehandsvising av effekt på fleire merkelapper', 'sr': 'Tw-StAR na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: Preobrađivanje utjecaja na višeetičku klasifikaciju emocija', 'ur': 'دوئوئل-2018 ٹاکس ۱ پر دوئوئل استارر: Multi-label Emotion Classification پر پیش پردازی اثر', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 1: Multi- label Emotion Classification uchun Preprocessing Impact', 'vi': 'Twa-Ssar at SemEvl-208 Task 1: Tác dụng mặc định với hạng cảm xúc đa nhãn', 'nl': 'Tw-StAR bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Effect van voorbewerking op Multi-label Emotie Classificatie', 'hr': 'Tw-StAR na pola evaluacije-2018 zadatak 1: Preobrađivanje utjecaja na klasifikaciju višeetičkih emocija', 'da': 'Tw-StAR på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Forhåndsbehandling påvirkning af flere mærker følelsesklassificering', 'id': 'Tw-StAR di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Preproses Impact on Multi-label Emotion Classification', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Предварителната обработка на въздействието върху многоетикетната емоционална класификация', 'de': 'Tw-StAR bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Auswirkungen der Vorverarbeitung auf die Multi-Label Emotion Klassifizierung', 'tr': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Preprocessing Impact on Multi-label Emotion Classification', 'ko': 'Tw StAR이 SemEval-18 작업 1: 다중 태그 정서 분류에 미치는 영향 미리 처리', 'af': 'Tw- Star by SemEval- 2018 Opdrag 1: Voorverwerking Impact op Multi- label Emotie Klassifikasie', 'fa': '۲- StAR در پایین سال ۲۰۱۸ کار ۱: اثر پیش\u200cپردازی روی کلاس\u200cشناسی احساسات چندین برچسب', 'sw': 'Makala ya Twita-StAR kwenye SemEval-2018 Task 1: Utafiti wa Kushinikiza Tamko la Kutangaza Tamko', 'am': 'ስራ 1: Preprocessing Impact on Multi-label Emotion Classification', 'hy': 'Tw-', 'bs': 'Tw-StAR na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: Preobrađivanje utjecaja na klasifikaciju višeetičkih emocija', 'ca': 'Tw-StAR a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Preprocessing Impact on Multi-label Emotion Classification', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের টুইট-স্টার ১: বহুল-লেবেল ইমোটিশন ক্লাসিশনের প্রেসেসিং প্রভাব', 'et': 'Tw-StAR SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Eeltöötluse mõju mitme märgisega emotsioonide klassifikatsioonile', 'sq': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Preprocessing Impact on Multi-label Emotion Classification', 'fi': 'Tw-StAR SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Esikäsittelyn vaikutus monimerkkiseen tunneluokitukseen', 'cs': 'Tw-StAR na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Vliv předzpracování na klasifikaci emocí s více etiketami', 'az': 'Yarı-Eval-2018 Gözmü 1: çoxlu etiketli Emotiyon Klasifikasiyasında Ön-işləmə Etkisi', 'he': 'Tw-StAR ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: השפעה מראשית לעבודה על קליфікаציה של רגשות מרובות', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'sk': 'Tw-StAR na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Vpliv predobdelave na razvrstitev čustev z več oznakami', 'jv': 'Two-stAR at semi-inval-2008 task 1: pretracing Impoct on Multi-label emuation', 'bo': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Preprocessing Impact on Multi-label Emotion Classification'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe our contribution in SemEval-2018 contest. We tackled task 1 Affect in Tweets, subtask E-c Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification). A multilabel classification system Tw-StAR was developed to recognize the emotions embedded in Arabic, English and Spanish tweets. To handle the multi-label classification problem via traditional classifiers, we employed the binary relevance transformation strategy while a TF-IDF scheme was used to generate the tweets’ features. We investigated using single and combinations of several preprocessing tasks to further improve the performance. The results showed that specific combinations of preprocessing tasks could significantly improve the evaluation measures. This has been later emphasized by the official results as our system ranked 3rd for both Arabic and Spanish datasets and 14th for the English dataset.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف مساهمتنا في مسابقة SemEval-2018. لقد عالجنا المهمة 1 "التأثير في التغريدات" ، المهمة الفرعية E-c "الكشف عن المشاعر (تصنيف متعدد العلامات)". تم تطوير نظام تصنيف متعدد العلامات Tw-StAR للتعرف على المشاعر المضمنة في التغريدات العربية والإنجليزية والإسبانية. للتعامل مع مشكلة التصنيف متعدد الملصقات عبر المصنفات التقليدية ، استخدمنا استراتيجية تحويل الصلة الثنائية بينما تم استخدام مخطط TF-IDF لإنشاء ميزات التغريدات. لقد حققنا في استخدام مهام فردية ومجموعات من العديد من مهام المعالجة المسبقة لتحسين الأداء. أظهرت النتائج أن مجموعات محددة من مهام المعالجة المسبقة يمكن أن تحسن بشكل كبير تدابير التقييم. وقد تم التأكيد على ذلك لاحقًا من خلال النتائج الرسمية حيث احتل نظامنا المرتبة الثالثة لكل من مجموعات البيانات العربية والإسبانية والمرتبة 14 لمجموعة البيانات الإنجليزية.', 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos nuestra contribución al concurso SemEval-2018. Abordamos la tarea 1 «Afecto en los Tweets», la subtarea e-C «Detección de emociones (clasificación de etiquetas múltiples)». Se desarrolló un sistema de clasificación multietiqueta TW-Star para reconocer las emociones incrustadas en los tuits en árabe, inglés y español. Para gestionar el problema de la clasificación de etiquetas múltiples mediante clasificadores tradicionales, empleamos la estrategia de transformación de relevancia binaria, mientras que se utilizó un esquema TF-IDF para generar las características de los tuits. Investigamos el uso de tareas de preprocesamiento individuales y combinaciones de varias para mejorar aún más el rendimiento. Los resultados mostraron que las combinaciones específicas de tareas de preprocesamiento podrían mejorar significativamente las medidas de evaluación. Esto fue enfatizado más tarde por los resultados oficiales, ya que nuestro sistema ocupó el tercer lugar en los conjuntos de datos en árabe y español y el 14 en el conjunto de datos en inglés.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons notre contribution au concours SemEval-2018. Nous avons abordé la tâche 1 «\xa0Affect dans les Tweets\xa0», la sous-tâche e-C «\xa0Détecter les émotions (classification multi-étiquettes)\xa0». Un système de classification multi-étiquettes TW-Star a été développé pour reconnaître les émotions intégrées dans les tweets en arabe, en anglais et en espagnol. Pour gérer le problème de classification multi-étiquettes via des classificateurs traditionnels, nous avons utilisé la stratégie de transformation de pertinence binaire tandis qu'un schéma TF-IDF a été utilisé pour générer les caractéristiques des tweets. Nous avons étudié l'utilisation d'une seule tâche et d'une combinaison de plusieurs tâches de prétraitement afin d'améliorer encore les performances. Les résultats ont montré que des combinaisons spécifiques de tâches de prétraitement pouvaient améliorer de manière significative les mesures d'évaluation. Cela a ensuite été souligné par les résultats officiels puisque notre système s'est classé au 3e rang pour les ensembles de données en arabe et en espagnol et au 14e rang pour l'ensemble de données anglais.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos nossa contribuição no concurso SemEval-2018. Abordamos a tarefa 1 “Affect in Tweets”, subtarefa E-c “Detecting Emotions (classification multi-label)”. Um sistema de classificação multilabel Tw-StAR foi desenvolvido para reconhecer as emoções embutidas em tweets em árabe, inglês e espanhol. Para lidar com o problema de classificação multi-rótulo por meio de classificadores tradicionais, empregamos a estratégia de transformação de relevância binária enquanto um esquema TF-IDF foi usado para gerar as características dos tweets. Investigamos o uso de tarefas únicas e combinações de várias tarefas de pré-processamento para melhorar ainda mais o desempenho. Os resultados mostraram que combinações específicas de tarefas de pré-processamento podem melhorar significativamente as medidas de avaliação. Isso foi enfatizado posteriormente pelos resultados oficiais, pois nosso sistema ficou em 3º lugar para conjuntos de dados em árabe e espanhol e em 14º para o conjunto de dados em inglês.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018コンテストでの貢献について述べる。タスク1「ツイートに影響を与える」、サブタスクE - C「感情の検出（マルチラベル分類）」に取り組みました。アラビア語、英語、スペイン語のツイートに埋め込まれた感情を認識するために、マルチラベル分類システムTw - Starが開発されました。従来の分類子を介してマルチラベル分類問題に対処するために、TF - IDFスキームを使用してツイートの特徴を生成しながら、バイナリ関連性変換戦略を採用しました。パフォーマンスをさらに向上させるために、いくつかの前処理タスクの単一および組み合わせを使用して調査しました。その結果、前処理タスクの特定の組み合わせは、評価尺度を大幅に改善することができることが示された。これは、アラビア語とスペイン語の両方のデータセットで3位、英語のデータセットで14位にランク付けされたため、後に公式の結果によって強調されています。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем наш вклад в конкурс SemEval-2018. Мы рассмотрели задачу 1 «Влияние в твитах», подзадача E-c «Обнаружение эмоций (многоуровневая классификация)». Для распознавания эмоций, заложенных в твитах на арабском, английском и испанском языках, была разработана многоуровневая система классификации Tw-Star. Для решения проблемы многоуровневой классификации с помощью традиционных классификаторов мы использовали стратегию преобразования двоичной релевантности, в то время как для создания функций твитов использовалась схема TF-IDF. Мы исследовали использование одиночных и комбинаций нескольких задач предварительной обработки для дальнейшего улучшения производительности. Результаты показали, что конкретные комбинации задач предварительной обработки могут значительно улучшить показатели оценки. Позднее это было подчеркнуто официальными результатами, поскольку наша система занимала третье место как для арабского, так и для испанского наборов данных и 14 место для английского набора данных.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम SemEval-2018 प्रतियोगिता में हमारे योगदान का वर्णन करते हैं। हमने कार्य 1 "ट्वीट्स में प्रभाव", उप-कार्य ई-सी "भावनाओं का पता लगाना (बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण)" से निपटा। अरबी, अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश ट्वीट्स में एम्बेडेड भावनाओं को पहचानने के लिए एक मल्टीलेबल वर्गीकरण प्रणाली Tw-StAR विकसित की गई थी। पारंपरिक क्लासिफायरके माध्यम से बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण समस्या को संभालने के लिए, हमने बाइनरी प्रासंगिकता परिवर्तन रणनीति को नियोजित किया, जबकि ट्वीट्स की सुविधाओं को उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक टीएफ-आईडीएफ योजना का उपयोग किया गया था। हमने प्रदर्शन को और बेहतर बनाने के लिए कई प्रीप्रोसेसिंग कार्यों के एकल और संयोजनों का उपयोग करके जांच की। परिणामों से पता चला है कि प्रीप्रोसेसिंग कार्यों के विशिष्ट संयोजन मूल्यांकन उपायों में काफी सुधार कर सकते हैं। बाद में आधिकारिक परिणामों द्वारा इस पर जोर दिया गया है क्योंकि हमारा सिस्टम अरबी और स्पेनिश डेटासेट दोनों के लिए तीसरे स्थान पर है और अंग्रेजी डेटासेट के लिए 14 वां स्थान है।', 'zh': '本文中,述SemEval-2018竞献。 吾曹解事1"推文中之化",子职E-c"检测情怀(多标签类)"。 发一多标类系统Tw-StAR,以识嵌阿拉伯语,英语西班牙语推文中情。 以旧器多标签分类,用二进制相关性转换之策,兼用TF-IDF方以成推文之征。 论用多预处理,合而进一步提高性。 结果表明,预处理事著为善论。 官后强之,以吾系于阿拉伯语、西班牙语数集排名第3,于英语数集排名第14。', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar ár gcion tairbhe i gcomórtas SemEval-2018. Thugamar faoi thasc 1 “Affect in Tweets”, fothasc E-c “Mothúcháin a Bhrath (rangú illipéid)”. Forbraíodh córas rangaithe illipéid Tw-StAR chun na mothúcháin atá leabaithe i dtvuíteanna Araibis, Béarla agus Spáinnise a aithint. Chun an fhadhb aicmithe illipéid a láimhseáil trí aicmitheoirí traidisiúnta, d’úsáideamar an straitéis dhénártha um chlaochlú ábharthachta agus baineadh úsáid as scéim TF-IDF chun gnéithe na dtvuíteanna a ghiniúint. Rinneamar imscrúdú ag baint úsáide as tascanna singil agus teaglaim de roinnt tascanna réamhphróiseála chun an fheidhmíocht a fheabhsú tuilleadh. Léiríodh sna torthaí go bhféadfadh teaglaim shonracha de thascanna réamhphróiseála feabhas suntasach a chur ar na bearta meastóireachta. Leagadh béim air seo níos déanaí sna torthaí oifigiúla toisc go raibh ár gcóras sa 3ú háit do thacair shonraí Araibis agus Spáinnise agus sa 14ú háit do thacair sonraí Béarla.', 'ka': "ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენი დამატებით SemEval-2018-ში. ჩვენ გავაკეთებეთ სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო E- c 'ემუშაოების განახსნა' (მრავალური ლექტი Multilabel კლასიფიკაციის სისტემა Tw-StAR განვითარებული იყო, რომ აპაბიური, ანგლისური და სპანელი tweets-ში ჩვენებული ემოციების განვითარება. მრავალური კლასიფიკაციის პრობლემების გამოყენებათვის, ჩვენ დავამუშავეთ ბინარიური შესანიშვნელოვანი ტრანფორმაციის სტრატიგია, როცა TF-IDF სქემი გამოყენებულია ტივიტების ფ ჩვენ განსხვავებდით ერთადერთი და კომბინციების გამოყენებას, რამდენიმე წინაპროცესის დავამუშავებთ, რომ უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენები გაჩვენეთ, რომ განსაკუთრებული კომბინეციები წინაპროცესების შესაძლებელია მნიშვნელოვანი განსაკუთრებულება. ეს შემდეგ უფრო მეტად აღმოჩენა მონაცემებებით, როგორც ჩვენი სისტემა უფრო მეტად აპაბიური და სონალიური მონაცემებებისთვის და მე-14-ის ინგლისური მო", 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a SemEval-2018 versenyen való hozzájárulásunkat. Az "Érzelmek felismerése" (többcímkés osztályozás) című E-c alcsoporttal foglalkoztunk. Az arab, angol és spanyol tweetekben beágyazott érzelmek felismerésére kifejlesztettük a Tw-StAR többcímkés osztályozási rendszert. A többcímkés osztályozási probléma hagyományos osztályozókon keresztül történő kezelésére a bináris relevancia transzformációs stratégiát alkalmaztuk, míg a tweetek funkcióinak létrehozására TF-IDF sémát használtuk. A teljesítmény további javítása érdekében több előfeldolgozási feladat egyszeri és kombinációjával vizsgáltuk. Az eredmények azt mutatták, hogy az előfeldolgozási feladatok konkrét kombinációja jelentősen javíthatja az értékelési intézkedéseket. Ezt később hangsúlyozták a hivatalos eredmények is, hiszen rendszerünk az arab és spanyol adatkészletek esetében a harmadik helyen, az angol adatkészletek esetében pedig a 14. helyen áll.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία περιγράφουμε τη συμβολή μας στο διαγωνισμό. Αντιμετωπίσαμε το έργο 1 "Επίδραση στα tweets", το δευτερεύον ερώτημα Ε-γ "Ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων (ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών ετικετών)". Ένα σύστημα ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών ετικετών αναπτύχθηκε για να αναγνωρίσει τα συναισθήματα που ενσωματώνονται στα αραβικά, αγγλικά και ισπανικά tweets. Για να χειριστούμε το πρόβλημα ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών ετικετών μέσω παραδοσιακών ταξινομητών, χρησιμοποιήσαμε τη στρατηγική μετατροπής δυαδικής συνάφειας ενώ χρησιμοποιήθηκε ένα σχέδιο για την παραγωγή των χαρακτηριστικών των tweets. Ερευνήσαμε τη χρήση ενιαίων και συνδυασμών διαφόρων εργασιών προεπεξεργασίας για περαιτέρω βελτίωση της απόδοσης. Τα αποτελέσματα έδειξαν ότι συγκεκριμένοι συνδυασμοί εργασιών προεπεξεργασίας θα μπορούσαν να βελτιώσουν σημαντικά τα μέτρα αξιολόγησης. Αυτό έχει υπογραμμιστεί αργότερα από τα επίσημα αποτελέσματα καθώς το σύστημά μας κατατάχθηκε 3η τόσο για τα αραβικά όσο και για τα ισπανικά σύνολα δεδομένων και 14η για τα αγγλικά σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го опишуваме нашиот придонес на натпреварот SemEval-2018. Ја решивме задачата 1 „Влијание на твитови“, потпрашањето E-c „Детектирање емоции (мултиетикетна класификација)“. A multilabel classification system Tw-StAR was developed to recognize the emotions embedded in Arabic, English and Spanish tweets.  За да го решиме проблемот со класификацијата со мултиетикети преку традиционалните класификатори, ја употребивме бинарната стратегија за трансформација на релевантност додека схема TF-IDF беше употребена за генерирање на карактеристиките на твитовите. Истражувавме користејќи едно и комбинации на неколку препроцесирани задачи за понатамошно подобрување на резултатите. Резултатите покажаа дека специфичните комбинации на предпроцесорските задачи би можеле значително да ги подобрат мерките за проценка. Ова подоцна беше истакнато од официјалните резултати бидејќи нашиот систем се рангираше на трето место за арапските и шпанските податоци и на 14-тото место за англиските податоци.', 'it': 'In questo articolo, descriviamo il nostro contributo al concorso SemEval-2018. Abbiamo affrontato il compito 1 "Affect in Tweets", sottotask E-c "Detecting Emotions (classificazione multi-etichetta)". Un sistema di classificazione multilabel Tw-StAR è stato sviluppato per riconoscere le emozioni incorporate nei tweet arabi, inglesi e spagnoli. Per gestire il problema della classificazione multi-etichetta tramite classificatori tradizionali, abbiamo utilizzato la strategia di trasformazione della rilevanza binaria mentre uno schema TF-IDF è stato utilizzato per generare le caratteristiche dei tweet. Abbiamo studiato utilizzando singole e combinazioni di diversi compiti di pre-elaborazione per migliorare ulteriormente le prestazioni. I risultati hanno mostrato che combinazioni specifiche di compiti di pre-elaborazione potrebbero migliorare significativamente le misure di valutazione. Questo è stato poi sottolineato dai risultati ufficiali in quanto il nostro sistema si è classificato 3 ° per i set di dati arabi e spagnoli e 14 ° per i set di dati inglesi.', 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 'ടൂട്ടികളില്\u200d പ്രാധാന്യം ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു' ഉപജോലിയുടെ 'ഇ-c' വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് (പല-ലേബ അറബി, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്, സ്പാനിഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഉള്ള വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ഒരു മുള്\u200dട്ടിള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം വി To handle the multi-label classification problem via traditional classifiers, we employed the binary relevance transformation strategy while a TF-IDF scheme was used to generate the tweets' features.  പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒറ്റയ്ക്കും കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മുന്\u200dപ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തി അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d അറബിക്കും സ്പാനിഷ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റേറ്റുകളും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ മൂന്നാം", 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, niddeskrivu l-kontribut tagħna fil-kompetizzjoni SemEval-2018. Aħna ttrattajna l-kompitu 1 'Affett in Tweets', sottomistoqsija E-c 'Detezzjoni ta' Emozzjonijiet (klassifikazzjoni b'ħafna tikketti)'. Ġiet żviluppata sistema ta’ klassifikazzjoni multitikketta Tw-StAR biex tirrikonoxxi l-emozzjonijiet inkorporati f’tweets bl-Għarab, bl-Ingliż u bl-Ispanjol. Biex nindirizzaw il-problem a tal-klassifikazzjoni b’diversi tikketti permezz ta’ klassifikaturi tradizzjonali, użajna l-istrateġija ta’ trasformazzjoni ta’ rilevanza binarja filwaqt li ntużat skema TF-IDF biex tiġġenera l-karatteristiċi tat-tweets. Investigajna bl-użu ta’ kompiti singoli u kombinazzjonijiet ta’ diversi kompiti ta’ preproċessar biex ikomplu jtejbu l-prestazzjoni. Ir-riżultati wrew li kombinazzjonijiet speċifiċi ta’ kompiti ta’ preproċessar jistgħu jtejbu b’mod sinifikanti l-miżuri ta’ evalwazzjoni. Dan ġie enfasizzat aktar tard mir-riżultati uffiċjali billi s-sistema tagħna kklassifikat it-tielet għal settijiet ta’ dejta kemm Għarab kif ukoll Spanjol u l-14 għal sett ta’ dejta Ingliż.", 'kk': "Бұл қағазында біз біздің көмектесуімізді SemEval-2018 конкурсінде түсіндіреміз. Біз 1- тапсырманы 'Твиттерде әсер етеді', E- c 'көңіл күйлерін анықтау (көп белгілер классификациясы) арқылы сұрадық. Бірнеше белгілер классификациялау жүйесі Tw- StAR араб, ағылшын және испан tweets тізімінде ендірілген емоцияларды анықтау үшін құрылды. ТF-IDF сұлбасы tweets қасиеттерін құру үшін қолданылатын үшін көп жарлық классификациялау мәселесін әдетті классификациялар арқылы басқару үшін, бинарлық қасиеттерді түрлендіру стратегиясын қо Біз бірнеше өзгерту тапсырмаларының бір және бірнеше біріктірімізді қолдануды зерттедік. Нәтижелер тапсырмалардың өзгертілген біріктірімі оқу мерзімдерін өзгертуге болады. Содан кейін официалдық нәтижелер жүйеміз араб, испан деректер жиындарының 3-ші ретінде және ағылшын деректер жиындарының 14-ші ретінде бағытталды.", 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi vår bidrag i semiEval-2018-konkurransen. Vi løyste oppgåve 1 « Etter i Tweets », underspør e- c « Opna følelser (klassifikasjon med fleire merkelappar »). Name For å handtera det fleire merkelappeklassifikasjonsfeilet via tradisjonelle klassifikatorar, har vi arbeidt den binære relevante transformeringsstrategien mens ein TF-IDF-skjema ble brukt for å laga tweetefunksjonane. Vi undersøkte med enkelte og kombinasjonar av fleire førehandsamingsoppgåver for å forbetra utviklinga. Resultatet viste at spesifikke kombinasjonar av forhandsaming av oppgåver kan betydelig forbedra evalueringstiltak. Dette er seinare uttrykket av dei offisielle resultatene som systemet vårt rangert 3 for både arabiske og spanske datasett og 14 for engelske datasett.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy nasz wkład w konkurs SemEval-2018. Podjęliśmy zadanie 1 "Efekt w Tweetach", podzadanie E-c "Wykrywanie emocji (klasyfikacja wieloznakowa)". System klasyfikacji wieloznakowych Tw-StAR został opracowany, aby rozpoznawać emocje osadzone w arabskich, angielskich i hiszpańskich tweetach. Aby rozwiązać problem klasyfikacji wielu etykiet za pomocą tradycyjnych klasyfikatorów, zastosowaliśmy strategię transformacji relevantności binarnej, podczas gdy do generowania funkcji tweetów użyto schematu TF-IDF. Badaliśmy wykorzystanie pojedynczych i kombinacji kilku zadań wstępnych w celu dalszej poprawy wydajności. Wyniki wykazały, że konkretne kombinacje zadań wstępnych mogą znacząco poprawić środki oceny. Zostało to później podkreślone przez oficjalne wyniki, ponieważ nasz system zajął się trzecim miejscem zarówno dla arabskich, jak i hiszpańskich zbiorów danych oraz 14-tym dla angielskiego zbioru danych.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem contribuția noastră la concursul SemEval-2018. Am abordat sarcina 1 "Afect în tweets", subactivitatea E-c "Detectarea emoțiilor (clasificare multi-label)". Un sistem de clasificare multilabel Tw-StAR a fost dezvoltat pentru a recunoaște emoțiile încorporate în tweeturile arabe, engleze și spaniole. Pentru a gestiona problema clasificării multi-etichete prin intermediul clasificătorilor tradiționali, am folosit strategia de transformare a relevanței binare, în timp ce o schemă TF-IDF a fost folosită pentru a genera caracteristicile tweeturilor. Am investigat folosind o singură și combinație a mai multor sarcini de pre-procesare pentru a îmbunătăți în continuare performanța. Rezultatele au arătat că combinațiile specifice de sarcini pre-procesare ar putea îmbunătăți semnificativ măsurile de evaluare. Acest lucru a fost mai târziu subliniat de rezultatele oficiale, sistemul nostru fiind pe locul 3 atât pentru seturile de date arabe cât și spaniole și pe locul 14 pentru setul de date engleză.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname savo indėlį konkurse SemEval-2018. Mes sprendėme 1 užduotį "Poveikis Tweetuose", E-c paklausimą "Emocijų nustatymas (daugiametė klasifikacija)". A multilabel classification system Tw-StAR was developed to recognize the emotions embedded in Arabic, English and Spanish tweets.  To handle the multi-label classification problem via traditional classifiers, we employed the binary relevance transformation strategy while a TF-IDF scheme was used to generate the tweets\' features.  Tirėme, kaip toliau gerinti veiklos rezultatus naudojome vieną ir kelių parengiamųjų procesų užduočių derinius. Iš rezultatų matyti, kad konkretūs parengiamųjų užduočių deriniai galėtų gerokai pagerinti vertinimo priemones. Vėliau tai pabrėžė oficialūs rezultatai, nes mūsų sistema buvo trečioji arabų ir ispanų duomenų rinkinių ir keturioliktoji anglų duomenų rinkinio.', 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan kontribusi kami dalam pertandingan SemEval-2018. Kami menangani tugas 1 'Affect in Tweets', subtitle E-c 'Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification)'. Sistem klasifikasi multilabel Tw-StAR dikembangkan untuk mengenali emosi yang terkandung dalam tweet Arab, Inggeris dan Sepanyol. Untuk menangani masalah klasifikasi multi-label melalui klasifikasi tradisional, kami menggunakan strategi pengubahan relevansi binari semasa skema TF-IDF digunakan untuk menghasilkan ciri-ciri tweet. Kami menyelidiki menggunakan satu dan kombinasi beberapa tugas pemprosesan untuk meningkatkan prestasi. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa kombinasi khusus tugas pemprosesan boleh meningkatkan langkah penilaian secara signifikan. This has been later emphasized by the official results as our system ranked 3rd for both Arabic and Spanish datasets and 14th for the English dataset.", 'so': "Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa warqaddayada ku saabsan qashinka SemEval-2018. Shaqada 1 'Affect in Tweets', sub-task E-c 'Detecting Emotions (Multi-label classification)'. A multilabel classification system Tw-StAR was developed to recognize the emotions embedded in Arabic, English and Spanish tweets.  Si aan u qabsado dhibaatada fasaxa badan oo kala duduwan, waxaynu isticmaalnay qorshaha isbedelka labaad, marka qorshaha TF-IDF loo isticmaalay inuu sameeyo qeybaha tweetka. Waxaannu baaritaannay isticmaalka hal iyo isku xir shaqooyin kala baaraandegista ah si aan u sii kordhino tababarka. Abaalkii waxay tuseen in ururada gaarka ah ee shaqaalaha ka baaraandegista ayaa si weyn u hagaajin kara qiyaastii. Tan dambe waxaa lagu soo bandhigay arimaha rasmiga ah, sababtoo ah nidaamkayaga waxay u soo bandhigtay saddexaad ee kooxda macluumaadka afka Carabiga iyo Isbanish iyo 14.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi vårt bidrag i SemEval-2018 tävlingen. Vi tog oss an uppgift 1 "Påverkan i tweets", underuppgift E-c "Detecting Emotions (multi-label klassificering)". Ett multilabel klassificeringssystem Tw-StAR utvecklades för att känna igen känslorna inbäddade i arabiska, engelska och spanska tweets. För att hantera klassificeringsproblemet med flera etiketter via traditionella klassificerare använde vi strategin för binär relevans transformation medan ett TF-IDF-schema användes för att generera tweets funktioner. Vi undersökte med hjälp av enstaka och kombinationer av flera förbehandlingsuppgifter för att ytterligare förbättra prestandan. Resultaten visade att specifika kombinationer av förbearbetande uppgifter avsevärt skulle kunna förbättra utvärderingsåtgärderna. Detta har senare betonats av de officiella resultaten då vårt system rankades 3:e för både arabiska och spanska datauppsättningar och 14:e för engelska datauppsättningar.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2018 өрсөлдөөнд оролцоог тайлбарлаж байна. Бид 1-р "Tweets-д нөлөөлөх нөлөөлөл"-г асуусан. E-с "Хүйтгэл хөдлөл мэдрэмжүүдийг олж мэдэх" (олон жагсаалтын хуваалтыг) асуусан. Олон жагсаалтын хуваалтын систем Tw-StAR-г Араб, Англи, Испан tweets-д орсон сэтгэл хөдлөлийг ойлгохын тулд хөгжүүлсэн. Олон-загварын хуваалтын асуудлыг уламжлалтын хэлбэрээр зохицуулахын тулд бид TF-IDF төлөвлөгөө нь tweets-ын хувьцаа үүсгэх үед хоёр давхар хамааралтай шилжүүлэлтийн стратегийг ашигласан. Бид ажиллагааг улам сайжруулахын тулд олон ажиллагааны нэг болон нийлүүлэлтийг ашиглан судалгаа хийсэн. Үүний үр дүнд тодорхой үйлдвэрлэлийн даалгаваруудын нэгтгэл нь үнэлгээний үйлдвэрлэлүүдийг үнэхээр сайжруулж чадна. Дараа нь бидний систем Араб болон Испан өгөгдлийн санг болон Англи хэлний өгөгдлийн сангийн 14-нд 3-р хэмжээний үндсэн үр дүнд тайлбарласан.', 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපි සෙම්වෙල් 2018 සටන්ඩ් එකේ අපේ සම්පූර්ණය විස්තර කරනවා. අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක 1 'ට්විට්ස් වලට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරනවා' E- c 'භාවිතය පරීක්ෂණය (බොහොම- ලේබල් වර්ගය)' කියලා  Multilabel classification system Tw-StAR is developinned to find the emoticons integrated in arabic, English and span tweets. මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂකයෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විධානය කරන්න, අපි බායිනාරි විශේෂ විධානය විධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කළා එක්ක සහ සම්බන්ධයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් වැඩි වැඩ කරන්න. ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ සංවිධානයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ විශේෂ ව මේක පස්සේ ප්\u200dරධානික ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් අරාබි සහ ස්පැනිස් දත්ත සෙට් සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි දත්ත සෙට් සටහන් 14වෙනි තුන", 'sr': "U ovom papiru opisujemo naš doprinos na natjecanju semiEval-2018. Uradili smo zadatak 1 'Posluživanje u Tweets', podpitati E-c 'Detektiv Emotija (klasifikacija multi-label)'. Razvijen je multilabel klasifikacijski sistem Tw-StAR kako bi prepoznao emocije ugrađene na arapskim, engleskim i španjolskim tweetima. Da bi se riješili problem sa klasifikacijom multi-etiketa putem tradicionalnih klasifikatora, zaposlili smo strategiju za transformaciju binarne relevantnosti dok je TF-IDF šema korišćena kako bi stvorili karakteristike tweeta. Istražili smo korištenje jedinstvenih i kombinacija nekoliko predobrađivanjskih zadataka kako bi dalje poboljšali izvedbu. Rezultati su pokazali da bi specifične kombinacije zadataka za preobradu mogle značajno poboljšati mjere procjene. To je kasnije naglasio zvanični rezultati jer je naš sistem bio treći za arapske i španjolske podatke i 14. za engleski podatke.", 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் செம்வால்-2018ல் எங்கள் பங்கீட்டை விவரிக்கிறோம். நாங்கள் 'Tweets' விளைவு' செய்யும் 'E-c 'உணர்வுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் ( பல- label வகைப்பு) A multilabel classification system Tw-StAR was developed to recognize the emotions embedded in Arabic, English and Spanish tweets.  மரபார்ந்த வகுப்பாளர்கள் மூலம் பல வகுப்பு பிரச்சினைகளை கையாள்வதற்கு, TF-IDF திட்டத்தை உருவாக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளோம். நாங்கள் ஒரே மற்றும் ஒருங்கிணைப்புகள் பயன்படுத்தி பல முன் செயல்களை மேலும் செய்ய முடியும் செயல்களை முன் முடிவு இது பின்னர் அதிகாரிய முடிவுகளால் குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது என்று நமது அமைப்பு அரேபிய மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் தரவுத்தளங்களுக்கு ம", 'ur': "اس کاغذ میں، ہم اپنی مدد کو سیم Eval-2018 میں توصیف کرتے ہیں. ہم نے دنیا 1 'ٹویٹوں میں اثر لگایا', E-c 'احساسات پتچا رہے ہیں (بہت سی لیبل کلاسیک)' کو پوچھ لیا۔ ایک multilabel classification system Tw-StAR developed to recognize the emotions embedded in Arabic, English and Spanish tweets. ملتی لابلیٹ کلاسپیٹ مشکل کو سنتی کلاسپیٹر کے ذریعے تحمل کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے دوئناری ارتباط تغییر استراتژی کو استعمال کیا جب کہ ایک TF-IDF اسکیم ٹویٹوں کی ویٹیوں کو جوڑنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا تھا. ہم نے ایک اور تعداد کی پیدائش کے مطابق تحقیق کی کہ ان کی عملکرد اضافہ کریں نتیجے دکھائے گئے کہ پیش پرسس کرنے کے کاموں کی مخصوص ترکیب کے مطابق ارزیابی اندازے اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں. یہ اس کے بعد رسمی نتائج کے ذریعہ سے تسبیح کیا گیا ہے کہ ہمارا سیستم عربی اور اسپانیایی ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے تیسرا درجہ تھا اور انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے چوتھا درجہ تھا۔", 'vi': 'Trong tờ báo này, chúng tôi mô tả sự đóng góp của chúng tôi trong cuộc thi SemEvol. Chúng ta giải quyết nhiệm vụ 1 "Xác nhận trong Tweet", chữ E-c\'Việc phát hiện c ảm xúc (phân loại đa nhãn). Một hệ thống phân hạng hai thẻ được phát triển để nhận biết cảm xúc được gắn trong Twitter theo tiếng Ả Rập, Anh và Tây Ban Nha. Để giải quyết vấn đề phân hạng đa nhãn qua các phân loại truyền thống, chúng tôi đã sử dụng chiến lược chuyển đổi liên quan nhị phân, trong khi có một kế hoạch TF-IDF được dùng để tạo các tính năng của tweet. Chúng tôi đã điều tra bằng cách sử dụng một và kết hợp của nhiều việc xử lý trước để cải thiện lợi nhuận. Kết quả cho thấy những kết hợp đặc biệt giữa các nhiệm vụ xử trước có thể cải thiện đáng kể các biện pháp đánh giá. Việc này đã được nhấn mạnh bởi các kết quả chính thức khi hệ thống được xếp hạng ba cho cả bộ dữ liệu Ả Rập và Tây Ban Nha và 14th cho bộ dữ liệu Anh.', 'uz': 'Bu qogʻozda SemEval-2018 konkurranida qanday qilamiz. Biz Twitterda "Shaxsiy" vazifani boshqaramiz, E-c "Emotilarni aniqlash (ko\'plab- ketlik darajasini) bajaramiz". A multilabel classification system Tw-StAR was developed to recognize the emotions embedded in Arabic, English and Spanish tweets.  Ko\'pchilik darajasining tarkibi muammolarini taʼminlov qilish uchun, biz Twitterlarning imkoniyatlarini yaratish uchun ikkita tarkib bog\'liq strategiya ishlatdik. Biz bir necha preprocessor vazifalarni bajarish uchun bitta va bir qanchalik bir necha ishlarni o\'rganishni o\'rganishni o\'rganishdik. @ info: whatsthis Keyinroq, bizning tizimmiz arab va Ispancha maʼlumotlar tarkibini va ingliz maʼlumotlar tarkibini 14 marta uchinchi tarkibi beradi.', 'hr': "U ovom papiru opisujemo naš doprinos na natjecanju semiEval-2018. Mi smo riješili zadatak 1 'utjecaj na Tweets', podupitali E-c 'otkrivanje emocija (klasifikacija više etiketa)'. Razvijen je multilabel klasifikacijski sustav Tw-StAR kako bi prepoznao emocije ugrađene na arapskim, engleskim i španjolskim tweetima. Da bi se riješili problem klasifikacije višeetičkih etiketa putem tradicionalnih klasifikatora, zaposlili smo strategiju za transformaciju bitnih relevantnosti dok je TF-IDF šema korišćena kako bi stvorili karakteristike tweeta. Istraživali smo s jednostavnim i kombinacijom nekoliko predobrazovanjskih zadataka kako bi se dalje poboljšali učinkovitost. Rezultati su pokazali da bi specifične kombinacije zadataka preobrađivanja mogle značajno poboljšati mjere procjene. To je kasnije istaknuto službenim rezultatima jer je naš sustav bio treći za arapske i španjolske podatke i 14. za engleski podatke.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме нашия принос в конкурса СемЕвал-2018. Поехме задача 1 "Въздействие в туитове", подзадача Е-в "Откриване на емоции (класификация с множество етикети)". Разработена е многоетикетна класификационна система за разпознаване на емоциите, вградени в арабски, английски и испански туитове. За да се справим с проблема с многоетикетната класификация чрез традиционни класификатори, ние използвахме стратегията за трансформация на двоичната релевантност, докато схема беше използвана за генериране на функциите на туитовете. Проучихме използването на единични и комбинации от няколко задачи за предварителна обработка за допълнително подобряване на производителността. Резултатите показаха, че специфичните комбинации от задачи за предварителна обработка могат значително да подобрят мерките за оценка. Това по-късно бе подчертано от официалните резултати, тъй като нашата система се класира на 3-то място както за арабските, така и за испанските масиви от данни и на 14-то място за английския масив от данни.', 'nl': "In dit artikel beschrijven we onze bijdrage aan de SemEval-2018 wedstrijd. We hebben taak 1 'Affect in Tweets' aangepakt, subtaak E-c 'Emoties detecteren (multi-label classificatie)'. Een multilabel classificatiesysteem Tw-StAR werd ontwikkeld om de emoties die ingebed zijn in Arabische, Engelse en Spaanse tweets te herkennen. Om het multi-label classificatieprobleem aan te pakken via traditionele classificatoren, gebruikten we de binaire relevantie transformatie strategie terwijl een TF-IDF schema werd gebruikt om de functies van de tweets te genereren. We onderzochten het gebruik van enkele en combinaties van verschillende preprocessing taken om de prestaties verder te verbeteren. Uit de resultaten bleek dat specifieke combinaties van preprocessing taken de evaluatiemaatregelen aanzienlijk konden verbeteren. Dit werd later benadrukt door de officiële resultaten aangezien ons systeem derde werd voor zowel Arabische als Spaanse datasets en 14e voor de Engelse dataset.", 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kami menjelaskan kontribusi kami dalam kontes SemEval-2018. Kami menangani tugas 1 'Affect in Tweets', subtask E-c 'Detekting Emotions (multi-label klasifikasi)'. Sistem klasifikasi multilabel Tw-StAR dikembangkan untuk mengenali emosi yang terlibat dalam tweet bahasa Arab, Inggris dan Spanyol. Untuk menangani masalah klasifikasi multi-label melalui klasifikasi tradisional, kami menggunakan strategi transformasi relevansi binari sementara skema TF-IDF digunakan untuk menghasilkan fitur tweet. Kami menyelidiki menggunakan satu dan kombinasi beberapa tugas pemroses untuk meningkatkan prestasi lebih lanjut. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa kombinasi spesifik dari tugas preproses dapat meningkatkan secara signifikan tindakan evaluasi. Hal ini telah kemudian didesak oleh hasil resmi sebagai sistem kami tertinggi ke-3 untuk dataset Arab dan Spanyol dan ke-14 untuk dataset Inggris.", 'de': "In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir unseren Beitrag im SemEval-2018 Wettbewerb. Wir haben die Aufgabe 1 'Affect in Tweets', Subtask E-c 'Detecting Emotions (Multi-Label Classification)' angegangen. Ein Multilabel-Klassifizierungssystem Tw-StAR wurde entwickelt, um die Emotionen in arabischen, englischen und spanischen Tweets zu erkennen. Um das Problem der Multi-Label-Klassifizierung über traditionelle Klassifikatoren zu lösen, verwendeten wir die binäre Relevanztransformationsstrategie, während ein TF-IDF-Schema verwendet wurde, um die Features der Tweets zu generieren. Wir untersuchten die Verwendung von Einzel- und Kombinationen mehrerer Vorverarbeitungsaufgaben, um die Leistung weiter zu verbessern. Die Ergebnisse zeigten, dass spezifische Kombinationen von Vorverarbeitungsaufgaben die Evaluationsmaßnahmen signifikant verbessern können. Dies wurde später durch die offiziellen Ergebnisse unterstrichen, da unser System sowohl für arabische als auch spanische Datensätze an dritter Stelle und für den englischen Datensatz an vierzehnter Stelle stand.", 'ko': "본고에서 우리가SemEval-18 경연에서 기여한 바를 묘사하였다.우리는 임무 1'트위터의 감정', 하위 임무 E-c'감정 검출(다중 라벨 분류)'을 해결했다.아랍어, 영어, 스페인어 트윗에 박힌 감정을 식별하기 위한 다중 태그 분류 시스템 Tw StAR을 개발했다.전통적인 분류기를 통해 다중 라벨 분류 문제를 처리하기 위해 우리는 2진법 관련 변환 전략을 채택하고 TF-IDF 방안을 이용하여 트윗의 특징을 생성했다.우리는 단일 예처리 임무와 여러 개의 예처리 임무의 조합을 사용하여 성능을 더욱 향상시키는 것을 연구했다.그 결과 특정한 예처리 임무 조합은 평가 지표를 현저하게 개선할 수 있다.우리 시스템은 아랍어와 스페인어 데이터 집합에서 3위, 영어 데이터 집합에서 14위를 차지했기 때문에 공식 결과는 이 점을 강조했다.", 'da': "I denne artikel beskriver vi vores bidrag i SemEval-2018 konkurrence. Vi tacklede opgave 1 'Påvirkning i tweets', underopgave E-c 'Detecting Emotions (multi-label klassificering)'. Et multilabel klassificeringssystem Tw-StAR blev udviklet til at genkende de følelser, der er indlejret i arabisk, engelsk og spansk tweets. For at håndtere multi-label klassifikationsproblemet via traditionelle klassificeringer anvendte vi den binære relevans transformation strategi, mens en TF-IDF ordning blev brugt til at generere tweets funktioner. Vi undersøgte ved hjælp af enkelte og kombinationer af flere forbearbejdningsopgaver for yderligere at forbedre ydeevnen. Resultaterne viste, at specifikke kombinationer af forberedende opgaver kunne forbedre evalueringsforanstaltningerne betydeligt. Dette er senere blevet understreget af de officielle resultater, da vores system rangerede 3. for både arabiske og spanske datasæt og 14. for det engelske datasæt.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما توصیف شرکت خود را در مسابقه\u200cی نیم Eval-2018 توصیف می\u200cکنیم. ما کار ۱ را تحت تأثیر توئیت قرار دادیم، پایین بپرسیم E-c „شناسایی احساسات (کلی برچسب\u200cهای زیادی)». یک سیستم مختصات مجموعه برچسب Tw-StAR برای شناختن احساسات در tweets عربی، انگلیسی و اسپانیایی توسعه شد. برای حفظ مشکل classification multi-label از طریق classifiers سنتی، ما استراتژی تغییر مربوط به دوگانی را استفاده کردیم در حالی که یک برنامه TF-IDF برای تولید ویت\u200cها استفاده می\u200cشد. ما با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای تک و مجموعه\u200cهای چندین کار پیش\u200cپردازی تحقیق کردیم تا عملکرد را بهتر کنیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان دادند که ترکیب\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از کار\u200cهای پیش\u200cپردازی می\u200cتوانند اندازه\u200cهای ارزیابی را بسیار بهتر کنند. این بعداً توسط نتایج رسمی به عنوان سیستم ما برای مجموعه داده های عربی و اسپانیایی و ۱۴م برای مجموعه داده های انگلیسی تسبیح داده شده است.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda SemEval-2018 duşuşygynda öz goşuşymyzy tassykladyk. Biz täzelikleri 1'den janlaşdyrdyk, E-c'den Aňlaşdyrmak(multi-label klasifikasyony) süýtgedik. Tw-StAR duýgularyny arabça, iňlisçe we espaňol tweets bilen tanamak üçin guruldy. Däpli-etiketli klasifikasyon meselelerini düzenlemek üçin, TF-IDF taslaýyşyny tweets karakterlerini oluşturmak üçin ullanýardykda binali wajyp terjime stratejisini ýöredik. Biz birnäçe öňe-emeli zadyň ýekeje we birleşmelerini ýüze etmek üçin bardyk. netijeler önlemek netijesinde takyk işlerin birleşmeleri çykyş çykyşlaryny has gowy edip biljekdigini görkezildi. Muny soňra resmi netijelerimiz tarapyndan görkezildi. Biziň sistemamyz hem Arapça, hem Ispanýolça veri setleri üçin 3-nji derejä döredildi we Iňlis veri setleri üçin 14-nji derejä.", 'sq': "Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë kontributin tonë në konkursin SemEval-2018. We tackled task 1 'Affect in Tweets', subtask E-c 'Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification)'.  Një sistem klasifikimi shumë-etikete Tw-StAR u zhvillua për të njohur emocionet e përfshira në tweetet arabe, angleze dhe spanjolle. Për të trajtuar problemin e klasifikimit me shumë etiketa nëpërmjet klasifikuesve tradicionalë, ne përdorëm strategjinë e transformimit të rëndësisë binare ndërsa një skemë TF-IDF u përdorë për të gjeneruar karakteristikat e tweeteve. We investigated using single and combinations of several preprocessing tasks to further improve the performance.  Rezultatet treguan se kombinimet specifike të detyrave të paraprocesimit mund të përmirësojnë ndjeshëm masat e vlerësimit. This has been later emphasized by the official results as our system ranked 3rd for both Arabic and Spanish datasets and 14th for the English dataset.", 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons bydraai in SemEval-2018-oorwinning. Ons het opdrag 1 'Afteken in Tweets', subtvra E- c 'Afteken Emotisies (multi- label klasifikasie)'. 'n Multilabel klassifikasie stelsel Tw- StAR is ontwikkeld om die emosies in Arabiese, Engels en Spaanse tweets te herken. Om die multi-etiket klassifikasie probleem te hanteer deur tradisionele klassifiseerders, het ons die binêre relevante transformasie strategie gebruik terwyl 'n TF-IDF skema gebruik word om die tweets se funksies te genereer. Ons het deur die gebruik van enkele en kombinasies van verskeie voorspoedingstaak te ondersoek om die prestasie verder te verbeter. Die resultate het vertoon dat spesifieke kombinasies van voorafverwerking opdragte betekenlik die evalueringsmaat kan verbeter. Hierdie is later ingeskryf deur die offisiele resultate as ons stelsel het 3reenkommer vir Arabiese en Spaanse datastelle en 14ste vir die Engelse datastel.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የሴmEval-2018 ተግባራችንን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ "በTweets ውስጥ ጥሩ ነው", የኢ-c "ምርጫዎችን ማግኘት (በብዙ-label መተላለፊያ)" አካል ስራዎችን አቀናብናል፡፡ በዐረብኛ፣ እንግሊዘኛ እና ስፓኒሽ ትዊተሮችን ለማውቀት የሁለት-ስቴር ክፍተት ስርዓት ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ የብዙ-label ክፍተቶችን በመቀበል ባሕላዊ ግንኙነት በተቃውሞቹ መካከል ለመቀበል፣ የTF-IDF ፕሮግራሙን የTwitteets ፍጥረቶች ለመፍጠር በተጠቃሚ ጊዜ የብናዊ ግንኙነት ለውጥ strategieን አስገኘን፡፡ አንድ እና በብዛት የፕሮግራም ስራዎችን ለመደጋጋገሚያ ለመጠቀም አንዲትን እና ማቀናቀል ነበር፡፡ ፍሬዎቹም የፊርፕሮግራም ሥርዓቶች የተለየ ግንኙነት ማስታወቂያውን በሚያበጅል ማሻል ይችላል፡፡ በኋላም የዓረብኛ እና ስፓኒሽ ዳታተሮች እና የኢንግሊዝኛ ዳታተር አካባቢ እና 14ኛ የተደረገ የሥልጣን ውጤቶች የተደረገ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր ներդրումը 2018 թվականի «Սեմեվալ» մրցույթի ժամանակ: Մենք վերաբերեցինք 1-ին «Աշխատություն թվիթերում», E-c-ի «Զգացմունքներ հայտնաբերելու (բազմաթիվ պիտակների դասակարգման)» ենթահարցին: Մի բազմապիտակ դասակարգման համակարգ է զարգացել, որպեսզի ճանաչեն արաբերական, անգլերեն և իսպաներեն թվիթերում ներգրավված զգացմունքները: Բազմաթիվ պիտակների դասակարգման խնդիրը վերաբերելու համար ավանդական դասակարգողների միջոցով, մենք օգտագործեցինք երկու կարևորության վերափոխման ռազմավարությունը, մինչդեռ ԹՖ-IDF-ի ծրագիրը օգտագործվել էր թվիթերի հատկությունների ստեղծ Մենք ուսումնասիրեցինք, օգտագործելով մի քանի նախամշակվող խնդիրների միակ և համադրումներ, որպեսզի շարունակենք բարելավել արդյունքը: Արդյունքները ցույց տվեցին, որ նախամշակվող խնդիրների հատուկ համադրումները կարող են նշանակալի բարելավել գնահատման չափումները: Ավելի ուշ, սա կրկնվել է պաշտոնական արդյունքների կողմից, քանի որ մեր համակարգը դասակարգվել է արաբերական և իսպանական տվյալների 3-րդ դասակարգով և անգլերենի 14-րդ դասակարգով:', 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea mchango wetu katika mashindano ya SemEval-2018. Tulikutana na kazi 1 'Inaathirika kwenye Twita', tumetumia ujumbe wa E-c 'Kuchunguza Emotions (uangalizi wa mitandao mingi)'... Mfumo wa kutafsiri kwa lugha mbalimbali wa Tw-StAR uliundwa ili kutambua hisia zilizowekwa katika twiti za Kiarabu, Kiingereza na Kihispania. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo la usambazaji wa mitandao mbalimbali kupitia wataalamu wa kitamaduni, tulitumia mkakati wa mabadiliko wa mbili wakati mpango wa TF-IDF ulitumika kutengeneza sifa za twita. We investigated using single and combinations of several preprocessing tasks to further improve the performance.  Matokeo yalionyesha kuwa muunganiko maalum wa kazi za upasuaji kunaweza kuboresha hatua za uchunguzi. Baadae hii imesisitizwa na matokeo rasmi wakati mfumo wetu ulikuwa wa tatu kwa ajili ya seti za data za Kiarabu na Kihispania na ya 14 kwa ajili ya seti ya takwimu za Kiingereza.", 'bs': "U ovom papiru opisujemo naš doprinos na natjecanju semiEval-2018. Uradili smo zadatak 1 'utjecaj na Tweets', podpitati E-c 'Detektivna emocija (klasifikacija multi-etiketa)'. Razvijen je multilabel klasifikacijski sistem Tw-StAR kako bi prepoznao emocije ugrađene na arapskim, engleskim i španjolskim tweetima. Da bi se riješili problem sa klasifikacijom višeetičkih etiketa putem tradicionalnih klasifikatora, zaposlili smo binarnu strategiju transformacije relevantnosti dok je plan TF-IDF korišćen kako bi stvorili karakteristike tweeta. Istraživali smo korištenje jedinstvenih i kombinacija nekoliko predobrazovanjskih zadataka kako bi se dalje poboljšali učinkovitost. Rezultati su pokazali da bi specifične kombinacije zadataka za preobradu mogle značajno poboljšati mjere procjene. To je kasnije istaknuto zvaničnim rezultatima jer je naš sistem bio treći za arapske i španjolske datasete i 14. za englesku datasetu.", 'az': 'Bu kağıtda, halımızı yarışmaq üçün SemEval-2018 müharibəsində tanımlıyıq. Biz 1-ni "Tweets içində müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif" tövsiyə çəkdik, e-c\'i "Emotikləri keşfetmə (çoxlu etiket klasifikasyonu) altından soruşduk. Bir çoxlu etiket klasifikasiya sistemi Tw-StAR ərəb, İngilizce və İspanyol tweetlərdə olan duyguları tanıtmaq üçün təşkil edildi. TF-IDF taslağı twetlərin özelliklərini yaratmaq üçün istifadə ediləndə, çoxlu etiketli klasifikasiya problemini nəticə edənlər vasitəsilə işlədik. Biz hərəkəti daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün bir neçə təkrar işləmə işlərinin birlikləri və birlikləri istifadə etdik. Sonuçlar tədbirlərin əvvəlcə işlədiklərin müxtəlif kombinasyonlarının değerlendirmə ölçülərini çox yaxşılaşdırmağını göstərdi. Bu, daha sonra resmi sonuçlarımız sistemimiz ərəb, İspanyol veri setləri üçün üçüncü dərəcə və İngilis veri seti üçün 14üncü dərəcə verildi.', 'bn': "এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ প্রতিযোগিতায় আমাদের অবদান বর্ণনা করি। আমরা টুইটারে প্রভাবিত কাজের সাথে চুক্তি করেছিলাম, সাবকাজ ই-c 'ইমুটিশন সন্ধান করা (বহুল-লেবেল বিভাগ)। আরবী, ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশ টুইটে যে অনুভূতিগুলো স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করা হয়েছে তার জন্য একটি মাল্টিলাবেল ক্লাসিফেশন সিস্টে ঐতিহ্যবাহী শ্রেণীদের মাধ্যমে আমরা বাইনারি প্রাসঙ্গিক পরিবর্তন কৌশল ব্যবস্থা করেছি যখন টুইটের বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করা হয়েছিল। আমরা বেশ কিছু প্রক্রিয়ার কাজ ব্যবহার করে অনুসন্ধান করেছিলাম, যাতে প্রভাব উন্নত করার জন্য। ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে পূর্ব প্রক্রিয়ার কাজের নির্দিষ্ট সংযুক্তিগুলো মূল্যের মাধ্যমে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পরে আনুষ্ঠানিক ফলাফলের দ্বারা এটি জোর দেয়া হয়েছে যেহেতু আমাদের সিস্টেম আরবী এবং স্প্যানিশ ডাটাসেট এবং ইংরেজী তথ্য সেটের", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme osuuttamme SemEval-2018 -kilpailussa. Käsittelimme tehtävää 1 "Affect in Tweets", alatehtävää E-c "Tunteiden havaitseminen (moniniminen luokitus)". Monimerkkinen luokittelujärjestelmä Tw-StAR kehitettiin tunnistamaan arabian, englannin ja espanjan twiittien sisältämät tunteet. Monimerkkisen luokitteluongelman käsittelemiseksi perinteisten luokittelijoiden avulla käytimme binaarisen relevanssin muunnosstrategiaa, kun taas tweettien ominaisuuksien tuottamiseen käytettiin TF-IDF-järjestelmää. Tutkimme yksittäisten ja useiden esikäsittelytehtävien yhdistelmiä suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi entisestään. Tulokset osoittivat, että tietyt esikäsittelytehtävien yhdistelmät voisivat merkittävästi parantaa arviointitoimenpiteitä. Tätä on myöhemmin korostettu virallisissa tuloksissa, sillä järjestelmämme sijoittui kolmanneksi sekä arabian että espanjan aineistojen osalta ja 14. sijalle englanninkielisten aineistojen osalta.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame oma panust SemEval-2018 konkursil. Tegelesime ülesandega 1 "Mõju tweetides", alamülesandega E-c "Emotsioonide tuvastamine (mitme märgisega klassifikatsioon)". Mitmemärgiseline klassifikatsioonisüsteem Tw-StAR töötati välja, et ära tunda araabia, inglise ja hispaania säutsides sisalduvaid emotsioone. Mitme märgisega klassifitseerimise probleemi lahendamiseks traditsiooniliste klassifitseerijate kaudu kasutasime binaarset tähtsuse muundamise strateegiat, samas kui TF-IDF skeemi kasutati säutsude funktsioonide genereerimiseks. Uurisime üksikute ja mitmete eeltöötlusülesannete kombinatsioonide kasutamist jõudluse edasiseks parandamiseks. Tulemused näitasid, et eeltöötlusülesannete konkreetsed kombinatsioonid võivad hindamismeetmeid oluliselt parandada. Seda on hiljem ametlikud tulemused rõhutanud, sest meie süsteem on kolmandal kohal nii araabia kui ka hispaania andmekogumite osas ja 14. kohal inglise andmekogumite osas.', 'ca': 'En aquest article, descrivim la nostra contribució al concurs SemEval-2018. Vam abordar la tasca 1 "Afectar en Tweets", subtanya E-c "Detectar emocions" (classificació multietiqueta)". Un sistema de classificació multietiqueta Tw-StAR va ser desenvolupat per reconèixer les emocions incorporades en tweets àrab, anglès i espanyol. Per tractar el problem a de classificació multietiqueta mitjançant classificadors tradicionals, vam utilitzar l\'estratègia de transformació de la pertinencia binaria mentre un esquema TF-IDF va ser utilitzat per generar les característiques dels tweets. Vam investigar fent servir una sola i combinacions de diverses tasques de preprocessió per millorar més el rendiment. Els resultats van demostrar que combinacions específiques de tasques de preparació podrien millorar significativament les mesures d\'evaluació. Això s\'ha destacat més tard pels resultats oficials, mentre el nostre sistema es va classificar en tercer lloc per a conjunts de dades àrabs i espanyols i en quart lloc per al conjunt de dades anglès.', 'cs': "V tomto článku popisujeme náš příspěvek v soutěži SemEval-2018. Řešili jsme úkol 1 'Affect in Tweets', podúkol E-c 'Detekce emocí (multi-label classification)'. Multilabel klasifikační systém Tw-StAR byl vyvinut pro rozpoznání emocí vložených v arabských, anglických a španělských tweetech. Pro řešení problému klasifikace s více štítky pomocí tradičních klasifikátorů jsme použili strategii transformace binární relevance, zatímco pro generování funkcí tweetů bylo použito TF-IDF schéma. Pro další zlepšení výkonu jsme zkoumali použití jednotlivých a kombinací několika předzpracovávacích úloh. Výsledky ukázaly, že specifické kombinace předzpracovávacích úkolů by mohly výrazně zlepšit hodnotící opatření. To bylo později zdůrazněno oficiálními výsledky, neboť náš systém byl třetí pro arabské a španělské datové soubory a čtrnáctý pro anglický datový soubor.", 'jv': "Nang pepul iki, kita ngubah njaluk-njaluk awakdhéwé ning atik seminval-2008 Awake Sistem sing karo multilabel sing dibenalke Two-stAR dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno karo kuwi duwisan karo Perancis, Inggris karo kiper pitik. To handle the multi-label CLASS question by Traditional CLASS, we used the Binary Relative transformation policy when a T-ID scheme was used to Generate the Tuts' parameters. Awak dhéwé yatatu nggambar obah-obahan lan akeh sampeyan kanggo ngerasakno njaluké nggawe barang nggawe barang. Rejaling Iki artêk dhéwé beraksi sing dikarepaké Ofisial sing ditambangé awak dhéwé sistem sing katêpakan karo dataset arab karo Spanyol lan 14 kanggo dataset Inggris.", 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo naš prispevek na tekmovanju SemEval-2018. Opravili smo nalogo 1 "Vpliv v tweets", podnalogo E-c "Zaznavanje čustev (razvrstitev z več oznakami)". Za prepoznavanje čustev v arabščini, angleščini in španščini je bil razvit večoznačni sistem klasifikacije Tw-StAR. Za reševanje problema klasifikacije z več oznakami prek tradicionalnih klasifikacijskih sistemov smo uporabili strategijo transformacije binarne relevantnosti, za generiranje funkcij tweetov pa smo uporabili shemo TF-IDF. Za nadaljnje izboljšanje zmogljivosti smo raziskovali uporabo posameznih in kombinacij več predobdelavnih nalog. Rezultati so pokazali, da lahko posebne kombinacije predobdelavnih nalog bistveno izboljšajo ukrepe ocenjevanja. To so kasneje poudarili uradni rezultati, saj se je naš sistem uvrstil na 3. mesto za arabske in španske nabore podatkov in 14. mesto za angleške nabore podatkov.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים את התרומה שלנו בתחרות SemEval-2018. התמודדדנו עם משימה 1 "השפעה בטוויטים", תחתונה E-c "גילוי רגשות (קליזציה multi-label)". מערכת מסווג מיוחדת התפתחה Tw-StAR כדי לזהות את הרגשות המוקמות בטוויטים ערביים, אנגליים וספרדיים. כדי להתמודד עם בעיית הסיווג של תווים רבים באמצעות מסווגים מסורתיים, השתמשנו באסטרטגיה לשינוי רלוונטיות בינרית בזמן ששימוש בתכנית TF-IDF כדי ליצור את תכונות הטוויטים. We investigated using single and combinations of several preprocessing tasks to further improve the performance.  The results showed that specific combinations of preprocessing tasks could significantly improve the evaluation measures.  זה הודגיש מאוחר יותר על ידי התוצאות הרשמיות כאשר המערכת שלנו התייצבה בשלישית עבור קבוצת נתונים ערבית וספרדית ו-14 עבור קבוצת נתונים אנגלית.', 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་འདིའི་གོ་སྐབས་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We tackled task 1 'Affect in Tweets', subtask E-c 'Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification)'. ཤོག་བྱང་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་Tw-StAR་ལ་སླེབས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྦྱར་ཡོད་པའི་སེམས་ཚོར་عرབ་དང་། ཨིན་ཇིས་དང To handle the multi-label classification problem via traditional classifiers, we employed the binary relevance transformation strategy while a TF-IDF scheme was used to generate the tweets' features. ང་ཚོས་རྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་ཐེངས་གཅིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་བརྗོད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བྱ་ཚུལ་ལྔ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱས་པའི་མཉམ་ལས་བསྡུས་བྱས་པར་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། གཞུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་འདི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཚད་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དང་སྐད་ཡིག", 'ha': "Ga wannan takarda, Munã bayyana mataimakanmu a cikin konkurrani SemEl-2018. Mun haɗa aikin 1 'Affect in Twitter', sub-aikin e-c'Find Emails (Classification of multi-label)'... An develope wani na'ura na fasasar multilabel, Twitter-StR dõmin ya san hisãnun da aka shigar da shi cikin harshen Larabci, Ingiriya da Isbanish. To, don ka yi amfani da mataimaki ga classifori masu multi-label, tunkuɗe tumori na shida masu labari, kuma a lokacin da aka yi amfani da wani shirin TF-IDF don ya sami tsarin Twitter. Ba mu yi ƙidãya ba da komai guda da komai cikin wasu aikin da za'a ƙara fikanci. Mataimakin ta nuna cewa komai masu ƙayyade wa aikin da za'a yi amfani da shi mai girma ga hanyarwa. Tana bayan an emphasize na fassarar rasmi kamar na'urarmu ta ranar ta uku wa data na Larabci da Isbanish da 14 na tsarin maɓallin Ingiriya."}
{'en': 'EmoIntens Tracker at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Emotional Intensity Levels in # Tweets', 'ar': 'EmoIntens Tracker في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: مستويات الشدة العاطفية في #Tweets', 'es': 'EmoIntens Tracker en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Niveles de intensidad emocional en #Tweets', 'pt': 'EmoIntens Tracker na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Níveis de Intensidade Emocional em #Tweets', 'fr': "EmoIntens Tracker à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Niveaux d'intensité émotionnelle dans #Tweets", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク1のEmoIntensトラッカー: # Tweetsの感情的な強度レベル', 'zh': 'EmoIntens Tracker at SemEval-2018 务1:#Tweets的情绪强度水平', 'ru': 'EmoIntens Tracker на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Уровни эмоциональной интенсивности в #Твитах', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर EmoIntens ट्रैकर: #Tweets में भावनात्मक तीव्रता का स्तर', 'ga': 'Lorgaire EmoIntens ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Leibhéil Déine Mothúchánach i #Tweets', 'ka': 'EmoIntens Tracker at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'hu': 'EmoIntens Tracker a SemEval-2018 feladat 1: Érzelmi intenzitási szintek a #Tweetekben', 'el': 'Παρακολούθηση στο έργο 1: Επίπεδα συναισθηματικής έντασης σε #Τουίτ', 'it': 'EmoIntens Tracker al SemEval-2018 Task 1: Livelli di intensità emotiva in #Tweets', 'lt': 'EmoIntens sekiklis pusėje 2018 m. 1 užduotis: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'kk': 'Көңіл- интенс қадамдастырғышы 1- жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында: көңіл көңіл деңгейі # Tweets деңгейінде', 'mk': 'EmoIntens Tracker на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Емоционални нивоа на интензитет во #Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ എമോയിന്റെന്\u200dസ് ട്രാക്കിര്\u200d: ഇമോയിന്\u200dറെസ്റ്റ് നില', 'mt': 'EmoIntens Tracker f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Livelli ta’ Intensità Emozzjonali f’#Tweets', 'ms': 'Penjejak EmoIntens pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Aras Intensiti Emotional dalam #Tweets', 'mn': 'EmoIntens Tracker at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'pl': 'EmoIntensis Tracker na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Poziomy intensywności emocjonalnej w #Tweetach', 'no': 'EmoIntens Tracker på halvEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Emotionalnivå for intensitet i # Tweets', 'ro': 'Tracker EmoIntens la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Nivelurile de intensitate emoțională în #Tweets', 'sr': 'EmoIntens Tracker na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: emocionalna intenzivna nivoa u #Tweets', 'si': 'EmoIntens Tracker at Half-2018 Job 1: Emotion Intensty Levels in #Tweets', 'so': 'Shaqada shaqada ee SemEval-2018', 'sv': 'EmoIntens Tracker på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Emotionell intensitet nivåer i #Tweets', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் உள்ள உணர்வுப் பின்பற்றி', 'ur': 'سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۱ پر EmoIntens Tracker: #Tweets میں احساس انٹنسیٹی سطح', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'máy theo dõi cảm xúc tại SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 1: cấp độ cao cảm xúc trong\\ 35lets;Tweet', 'nl': 'EmoIntensis Tracker op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Emotionale Intensiteitsniveaus in #Tweets', 'da': 'EmoIntens Tracker på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Følelsesmæssige intensitetsniveauer i #Tweets', 'hr': 'EmoIntens Tracker na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: razina emocionalne intenzitete u #Tweets', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Нива на емоционална интензивност в #Туитс', 'id': 'EmoIntens Tracker di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Tingkat Intensitas Emotional dalam #Tweets', 'de': 'EmoIntensis Tracker bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Emotionale Intensitätsniveaus in #Tweets', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 퀘스트 1: 트위터의 정서 강도 수준', 'sw': 'EmoIntens Tracker at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'af': 'EmoIntens Tracker by SemEval- 2018 Taak 1: Emotionale Intensiteit Vlakke in #Tweets', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 1: Emotional Intensity Level in #Tweets', 'sq': 'EmoIntens Tracker at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'az': 'EmoIntens Tracker at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'hy': 'EmoIntens Tracker at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ইমোইন্টেন্স ট্র্যাকার ১: টুইটারে Emotional Intense Level', 'bs': 'EmoIntens Tracker na semiEval-2018 zadatak 1: emocionalna intenzivna nivoa u #Tweets', 'tr': 'EmoIntens Tracker at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'cs': 'EmoIntensis Tracker na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Úrovně emoční intenzity v #Tweetech', 'fa': 'EmoIntens Tracker at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'ca': 'EmoIntens Tracker a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets', 'et': 'EmoIntens Tracker SemEval-2018 ülesanne 1: emotsionaalse intensiivsuse tasemed #Tweets', 'fi': 'EmoIntens Tracker SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 1: Emotionaaliset intensiteettitasot #Tweets', 'jv': 'EMOIntns tracer at semi-inval-2013 task 1: emutative Intensity Grades in#Two', 'sk': 'Sledilnik EmoIntens na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Ravni čustvene intenzivnosti v #Tweets', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'מעקב EmoIntens ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: רמות אינטנסיבות רגשית ב #Tweets', 'bo': 'EmoIntens Tracker at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotional Intensity Levels in #Tweets'}
{'en': 'The Affect in Tweets task is centered on emotions categorization and evaluation matrix using multi-language tweets (English and Spanish). In this research, SemEval Affect dataset was preprocessed, categorized, and evaluated accordingly (precision, recall, and accuracy). The system described in this paper is based on the implementation of supervised machine learning (Naive Bayes, KNN and SVM), deep learning (NN Tensor Flow model), and decision trees algorithms.', 'ar': 'تتركز مهمة "التأثير في التغريدات" على تصنيف العواطف ومصفوفة التقييم باستخدام التغريدات متعددة اللغات (الإنجليزية والإسبانية). في هذا البحث ، تمت معالجة مجموعة بيانات SemEval Affect وتصنيفها وتقييمها وفقًا لذلك (الدقة والاسترجاع والدقة). يعتمد النظام الموضح في هذه الورقة على تنفيذ التعلم الآلي الخاضع للإشراف (Naive Bayes و KNN و SVM) والتعلم العميق (نموذج NN Tensor Flow) وخوارزميات أشجار القرار.', 'fr': "La tâche «\xa0Affect dans les Tweets\xa0» est centrée sur la catégorisation des émotions et la matrice d'évaluation à l'aide de tweets multilingues (anglais et espagnol). Dans cette recherche, l'ensemble de données SemEval Affect a été prétraité, catégorisé et évalué en conséquence (précision, rappel et exactitude). Le système décrit dans cet article est basé sur la mise en œuvre de l'apprentissage automatique supervisé (Naive Bayes, KNN et SVM), du deep learning (modèle NN Tensor Flow) et des algorithmes d'arbres de décision.", 'pt': 'A tarefa “Affect in Tweets” está centrada na categorização de emoções e matriz de avaliação usando tweets em vários idiomas (inglês e espanhol). Nesta pesquisa, o conjunto de dados SemEval Affect foi pré-processado, categorizado e avaliado de acordo (precisão, recordação e exatidão). O sistema descrito neste artigo é baseado na implementação de algoritmos de aprendizado de máquina supervisionado (Naive Bayes, KNN e SVM), aprendizado profundo (modelo NN Tensor Flow) e árvores de decisão.', 'es': 'La tarea «Efecto en los Tweets» se centra en la clasificación de emociones y la matriz de evaluación mediante tuits multilingües (inglés y español). En esta investigación, el conjunto de datos de SemEval Affect se procesó previamente, se clasificó y se evaluó en consecuencia (precisión, recuperación y precisión). El sistema descrito en este artículo se basa en la implementación de algoritmos de aprendizaje automático supervisado (Naive Bayes, KNN y SVM), aprendizaje profundo (modelo NN Tensor Flow) y árboles de decisión.', 'ja': '「ツイートに影響を与える」タスクは、多言語のツイート（英語とスペイン語）を使用した感情の分類と評価マトリックスを中心としています。この研究では、SemEval Affectデータセットを前処理し、分類し、それに応じて評価した（精度、想起、および正確性）。本稿で説明するシステムは，監視下機械学習（ Naive Bayes, KNN, SVM ） ，深層学習（ NNテンソルフローモデル） ，決定木アルゴリズムの実装に基づいている．', 'zh': '推文之染,以多言推文(英语西班牙语)之情,分矩阵为心。 于是SemEval影响集预处理,类(精度,召还率准确性)。 本文统于监督机器学(素贝叶斯、KNN、SVM)、深学(NN张量流)、决策树算法。', 'hi': '"Tweets में प्रभाव" कार्य बहु-भाषा ट्वीट्स (अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश) का उपयोग करके भावनाओं के वर्गीकरण और मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स पर केंद्रित है। इस शोध में, SemEval Effect dataset को पूर्व-संसाधित, वर्गीकृत किया गया था, और तदनुसार मूल्यांकन किया गया था (परिशुद्धता, याद करना, और सटीकता)। इस पेपर में वर्णित प्रणाली पर्यवेक्षित मशीन लर्निंग (भोले बेयस, केएनएन और एसवीएम), डीप लर्निंग (एनएन टेंसर फ्लो मॉडल), और निर्णय पेड़ एल्गोरिदम के कार्यान्वयन पर आधारित है।', 'ru': 'Задача «Влияние в твитах» сосредоточена на матрице категоризации и оценки эмоций с использованием многоязычных твитов (на английском и испанском языках). В этом исследовании набор данных SemEval Affect был предварительно обработан, классифицирован и оценен соответствующим образом (прецизионность, отзыв и точность). Система, описанная в этой статье, основана на реализации контролируемого машинного обучения (Naive Bayes, KNN и SVM), глубокого обучения (модель NN Tensor Flow) и алгоритмов деревьев решений.', 'ga': 'Tá an tasc “Affect in Tweets” dírithe ar chatagóiriú mothúcháin agus ar mhaitrís meastóireachta ag baint úsáide as tvuíteanna iltheangacha (Béarla agus Spáinnis). Sa taighde seo, rinneadh tacar sonraí SemEval Affect a réamhphróiseáil, a chatagóiriú, agus a mheasúnú dá réir (cruinneas, aisghairm, agus cruinneas). Tá an córas a thuairiscítear sa pháipéar seo bunaithe ar fheidhmiú meaisínfhoghlama maoirsithe (Naive Bayes, KNN agus SVM), foghlaim dhomhain (múnla Sreabhadh Tensor NN), agus halgartaim crainn chinnidh.', 'ka': 'Tweets- ის დავალების შემდეგ ემოციების კატეგორიზაციის და განსაზღვრების მარტიკისთვის უფრო მრავალური ტივიტების გამოყენება (ანგლისური და სპანელი). ამ შესწავლობაში SemEval Affect მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია იყო პრეპროცესი, კატეგორიზაცია და შესაბამისი განსაზღვრება (მართლა, დახმარება და მართლა). სისტემა, რომელიც ამ დომენტში აღწერულია, იგივე განსაკუთრებული მანქანის სწავლების (Naive Bayes, KNN და SVM) გამოყენებაზე, ძალიან სწავლება (NN Tensor Flow Model) და გადაწყვეტილების ალდორიტების', 'hu': 'Az Affect in Tweets feladata az érzelmek kategorizálására és értékelési mátrixára összpontosít többnyelvű tweetekkel (angol és spanyol). Ebben a kutatásban a SemEval Affect adatkészletet előfeldolgozták, kategorizálták és értékelték ennek megfelelően (pontosság, visszahívás és pontosság). A tanulmányban leírt rendszer a felügyelt gépi tanulás (Naive Bayes, KNN és SVM), a mélytanulás (NN Tenzor Flow modell) és a döntésfák algoritmusainak megvalósításán alapul.', 'el': 'Το έργο του επικεντρώνεται στην κατηγοριοποίηση και αξιολόγηση συναισθημάτων χρησιμοποιώντας πολυγλωσσικά tweets (αγγλικά και ισπανικά). Σε αυτή την έρευνα, το σύνολο δεδομένων έχει προεπεξεργαστεί, κατηγοριοποιηθεί και αξιολογηθεί ανάλογα (ακρίβεια, ανάκληση και ακρίβεια). Το σύστημα που περιγράφεται στην παρούσα εργασία βασίζεται στην εφαρμογή εποπτευόμενης μηχανικής μάθησης (Naive Bayes, KNN και SVM), βαθιάς μάθησης (μοντέλο NN Tensor Flow) και αλγορίθμων δέντρων αποφάσεων.', 'kk': 'Tweets тапсырмасының әсері бірнеше тілді tweets (ағылшын және испан тілінен) қолданатын эмоциялар санаттарын баптау және оқиға матрицасының ортасында орналасады. Бұл зерттеулерде SemEval Effects деректер жиыны алдын- ала өзгертілген, категорияланған және солай бағалады (дұрыс, еске салу және дұрыс). Бұл қағазда таңдалған жүйе басқаруға негізделген механизм оқытуының (Naive Bayes, KNN және SVM) және түсінікті оқытуға (NN Tensor Flow моделі) негізделген және ағаштардың алгоритмдері.', 'it': "Il compito di The Affect in Tweets è incentrato sulla classificazione delle emozioni e sulla matrice di valutazione utilizzando tweet multilingue (inglese e spagnolo). In questa ricerca, il set di dati SemEval Affect è stato pre-elaborato, categorizzato e valutato di conseguenza (precisione, richiamo e precisione). Il sistema descritto in questo articolo si basa sull'implementazione di algoritmi di apprendimento automatico supervisionato (Naive Bayes, KNN e SVM), deep learning (modello NN Tensor Flow) e alberi decisionali.", 'lt': "The  Affect in Tweets' task is centered on emotions categorization and evaluation matrix using multi-language tweets (English and Spanish).  In this research, SemEval Affect dataset was preprocessed, categorized, and evaluated accordingly (precision, recall, and accuracy).  The system described in this paper is based on the implementation of supervised machine learning (Naive Bayes, KNN and SVM), deep learning (NN Tensor Flow model), and decision trees algorithms.", 'mk': "The  Affect in Tweets' task is centered on emotions categorization and evaluation matrix using multi-language tweets (English and Spanish).  In this research, SemEval Affect dataset was preprocessed, categorized, and evaluated accordingly (precision, recall, and accuracy).  Системот опишан во овој весник се базира на имплементацијата на надгледуваното машинско учење (Naive Bayes, KNN и SVM), длабоко учење (NN Tensor Flow модел) и алгоритми за дрвјата на одлуките.", 'ml': 'ടൂട്ടുകളിലുള്ള പ്രഭാവം വികാരങ്ങളുടെ വിഭാഗവിഭാഗവും മാറ്ററിക്സിന്റെ മേഖലയിലാണ്. പല ഭാഷകളുടെ ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു In this research, SemEval Affect dataset was preprocessed, categorized, and evaluated accordingly (precision, recall, and accuracy).  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റമാണ് നേവ് ബെയ്സ്, കെന്\u200dഎനിനും എസ്\u200cവിഎമ്, ആഴത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് (NN ടെന്\u200dസോര്\u200d പ', 'ms': "Tugas 'Affect in Tweets' ditetapkan pada kategorisasi emosi dan matriks penilaian menggunakan tweet berbilang bahasa (Bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol). In this research, SemEval Affect dataset was preprocessed, categorized, and evaluated accordingly (precision, recall, and accuracy).  The system described in this paper is based on the implementation of supervised machine learning (Naive Bayes, KNN and SVM), deep learning (NN Tensor Flow model), and decision trees algorithms.", 'mt': 'Il-kompitu tal-“Affett in Tweets” huwa ċentrat fuq il-kategorijizzazzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet u l-matriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni bl-użu ta’ tweets b’diversi lingwi (Ingliż u Spanjol). F’din ir-riċerka, is-sett ta’ dejta SemEval Affect ġie pproċessat minn qabel, ikkategorizzat, u evalwat skont dan (preċiżjoni, ġbir lura, u preċiżjoni). Is-sistema deskritta f’dan id-dokument hija bbażata fuq l-implimentazzjoni ta’ tagħlim bil-magni superviż (Naive Bayes, KNN u SVM), tagħlim fil-fond (mudell NN Tensor Flow), u algoritmi tas-siġar tad-deċiżjonijiet.', 'mn': 'Tweets-ын үйлдэл нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваарилалт, үнэлгээний матриц дээр олон хэл tweets (Англи болон Испан) ашигладаг. Энэ судалгаанд SemEval Effect өгөгдлийн сангууд өмнө үйлдвэрлэсэн, хуваарилагдсан бөгөөд адилхан үнэ цэнэтэй болсон. Энэ цаасан дээр тайлбарласан систем нь найв Бейс, KNN, SVM, гүн гүнзгий суралцах (NN Tensor Flow Model) болон модны алгоритмын шийдвэрлэл дээр суралцах юм.', 'pl': 'Zadanie "Affekt in Tweets" koncentruje się na kategoryzacji emocji i macierzy oceny za pomocą wielojęzycznych tweetów (angielski i hiszpański). W tym badaniu zbiór danych SemEval Affect został wstępnie przetworzony, kategoryzowany i odpowiednio oceniony (precyzja, przywołanie i dokładność). Opisany w artykule system opiera się na wdrożeniu nadzorowanego uczenia maszynowego (Naive Bayes, KNN i SVM), głębokiego uczenia (NN Tensor Flow model) oraz algorytmów drzew decyzyjnych.', 'no': 'Effekten i tweets- oppgåva er sentrert på følelseskategorisering og evalueringsmatrisen med fleirspråk tweets (engelsk og spansk). I denne forskningen vart datasett for semieffektar forhandsamar, kategorisert og evaluert derfor (nøyaktig, rekning og nøyaktig). Systemet som er beskriven i denne papiret er basert på implementasjonen av oversikt av maskinelæring (Naive Bayes, KNN og SVM), dyp læring (NN Tensor Flow model) og beslutningsstre-algoritme.', 'ro': 'Sarcina "Afect in Tweets" este centrată pe clasificarea emoțiilor și matricea de evaluare folosind tweet-uri multilingvistice (engleză și spaniolă). În această cercetare, setul de date SemEval afect a fost pre-procesat, clasificat și evaluat în consecință (precizie, rechemare și acuratețe). Sistemul descris în această lucrare se bazează pe implementarea algoritmilor de învățare automată supravegheată (Naive Bayes, KNN și SVM), învățare profundă (modelul NN Tensor Flow) și arbori de decizie.', 'so': 'Shaqada Tweetka waxyaabaha ku saabsan waxyaabaha uu ku qoran yahay qeybinta xisaabta iyo qiimeynta arimaha lagu isticmaalayo tweetka luuqadaha badan (Ingiriis iyo Isbanish). Baaritaankaas waxaa lagu horumariyey, lagu kala qaybiyey, lagu qiimeeyay (saxda, xusuusta, iyo saxda). Systemka warqaddan lagu soo qoray waxay ku saleysan tahay in lagu soo dejiyo waxbarashada maskaxda la ilaaliyo (Naive Bayes, KNN iyo SVM), waxbarasho aad u dheer (model NN Tensor Flow), iyo qorsheyaasha qoriga ah.', 'sr': 'Postojak u zadatku Tweets je usmjeren na matricu kategorizacije emocija i procjene koristeći višejezičke tweets (engleski i španjolski). U ovom istraživanju je predobrađena, kategorizirana i odgovarajući procjena kompleta podataka o semiEval Effects (preciznost, sećanje i tačnost). Sistem opišen u ovom papiru je baziran na provedbi nadzornog učenja mašine (Naive Bayes, KNN i SVM), dubokog učenja (NN Tensor Flow model) i algoritma drveća odlučenja.', 'si': "Tweets' ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ෙප්\u200dරතිකාරීය සංවේදනය සහ විශ්ලේෂණ මැට්\u200dරික්ස් භාෂාවක් විදිහට (ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, සෙම්වෙල් ප්\u200dරතිකාර දත්ත සූදානය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරලා තියෙන්නේ, පරික්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, සහ මේ පැත්තේ විශ්වාස කරපු පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පරික්ෂා කරපු පද්ධතිය (නේව් බේස්, KNN හා SVM), ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න (NN ටෙන්සර් ප්ලෝව් ම", 'sv': 'The Affect in Tweets uppgift är centrerad på känslokategorisering och utvärdering matris med hjälp av flerspråkiga tweets (engelska och spanska). I denna forskning har SemEval Affect-datauppsättningen förbehandlats, kategoriserats och utvärderats därefter (precision, återkallande och noggrannhet). Systemet som beskrivs i denna uppsats bygger på implementering av övervakad maskininlärning (Naive Bayes, KNN och SVM), djupinlärning (NN Tensor Flow modell) och beslutsträdsalgoritmer.', 'ta': "Tweets' பணியில் விளைவு உணர்வுகளை வகைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் மதிப்பிடும் மதிப்பிடும் மையமாக இருக்கிறது பல மொழி tweets (ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்ப இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், செம்வால் விளைவு தகவல் அமைப்பு முன் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது, வகைப்படுத்தப்பட்டது, அதனால் விளக்கப்பட்டது (துல்லியம இந்த காகிதத்தில் விவரிக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட இயந்திரம் கற்றுக்கொள்வது அடிப்படையாகும் (நீவ் பேய்ஸ், KNN மற்றும் SVM), ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொ", 'ur': 'ٹویٹ کے تابع میں اثر مصنوعی کا ذریعہ مختلف زبان ٹویٹ (انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی) کے مطابق مصنوعی اور ارزیابی ماٹریکس پر مرکز ہے۔ اس تحقیقات میں، سمویل اثرات ڈاٹ سٹ پہلے پردازش کی گئی، کاٹی کی گئی، اور اسی طرح (دقیق، یاد، اور دقیق) ارزش کی گئی۔ اس کاغذ میں توصیف کی سیستم نے نظارت کی ماشین کی تعلیم (Naive Bayes, KNN اور SVM) کی عمدگی پر (NN Tensor Flow Model) اور فیصلہ کے درختوں الگوریتم پر بنی ہے.', 'vi': "The affect in Tweet'mission is Trung tâm vào cảm xúc phân loại và đánh giá ma trận bằng đa ngôn ngữ tweet (English and Spanish). Trong nghiên cứu này, bộ dữ liệu nhạy bén của SemEvol được xử lý cẩn thận, phân loại và đánh giá thích đáng (chính xác, hồi phục, và chính xác). The system described in this paper is based on the implication of giám sát Machine leaving (Naive Bayes, KNN and SVM), deep learn (NNn Tensor Flow model) and deciring trees assignims.", 'uz': "Twitterlarning muammolari bir necha tillar Twitterlari (Ingliz va Ispanchadan foydalanuvchi) bilan hissiyalarning kategoriyatsiya va qiymatlashtirish matrikasini markaziga ega. Bu taʼminotda SemEval Affect maʼlumotlar tizimi oldin boshqarish, kattalashtirilgan va shunday qiymatga ega bo'ldi. Bu qogʻozdagi tizim taʼminlovchi mashinalar o'rganishni (Naiv Bayes, KNN va SVM), juda qiyin o'rganish (NN Tensor Flow modeli), va xususiyatlar algoritlarini bajarishga asoslangan.", 'nl': 'De taak van The Affect in Tweets is gericht op emoties categorisering en evaluatiematrix met behulp van meertalige tweets (Engels en Spaans). In dit onderzoek werd SemEval Affect dataset vooraf verwerkt, gecategoriseerd en dienovereenkomstig geëvalueerd (precisie, recall en nauwkeurigheid). Het in dit artikel beschreven systeem is gebaseerd op de implementatie van supervised machine learning (Naive Bayes, KNN en SVM), deep learning (NN Tensor Flow model) en beslissingsbomen algoritmes.', 'hr': 'Učinak u zadatku Tweets-a usmjeren je na matricu kategorizacije emocija i procjene s višejezičkim tweetima (engleski i španjolski). U ovom istraživanju, skupina podataka za semiEval Affect preobrađena je, kategorizirana i odgovarajući procjena (preciznost, sjećanje i preciznost). Sistem opisan u ovom papiru temeljan je na provedbi nadzornog učenja strojeva (Naive Bayes, KNN i SVM), dubokog učenja (NN Tensor Flow model) i algoritma drveća odlučenja.', 'bg': 'Задачата "Въздействието в туитовете" е съсредоточена върху категоризирането на емоциите и матрицата за оценка с помощта на многоезични туитове (английски и испански). В това изследване наборът от данни е предварително обработен, категоризиран и оценен съответно (прецизност, припомняне и точност). Системата, описана в тази статия, се основава на внедряването на контролирано машинно обучение (Naive Bayes, KNN и SVM), дълбоко обучение (NN Tensor Flow model) и алгоритми за дървета на вземане на решения.', 'da': "The Affect in Tweets' opgave er centreret om følelseskategorisering og evaluering matrix ved hjælp af flersprogede tweets (engelsk og spansk). I denne forskning blev SemEval Affect datasæt forbehandlet, kategoriseret og evalueret i overensstemmelse hermed (præcision, tilbagekaldelse og nøjagtighed). Systemet beskrevet i denne artikel er baseret på implementering af overvåget maskinlæring (Naive Bayes, KNN og SVM), dyb læring (NN Tensor Flow model) og beslutningstræer algoritmer.", 'de': 'Die Aufgabe von The Affect in Tweets konzentriert sich auf die Kategorisierung und Bewertung von Emotionen mittels mehrsprachiger Tweets (Englisch und Spanisch). In dieser Forschung wurde der SemEval Affect Datensatz vorverarbeitet, kategorisiert und entsprechend ausgewertet (Präzision, Rückruf und Genauigkeit). Das in dieser Arbeit beschriebene System basiert auf der Implementierung von überwachten Machine Learning (Naive Bayes, KNN und SVM), Deep Learning (NN Tensor Flow Modell) und Entscheidungsbäumen Algorithmen.', 'ko': '추문 중의 감정 임무는 다국어 추문(영어와 스페인어)을 사용하는 감정 분류와 평가 행렬에 집중된다.이 연구에서 SemEval 감정 데이터 세트를 미리 처리하고 분류하며 해당하는 평가(정확도, 리콜율과 정확성)를 실시한다.본고에서 기술한 시스템은 감독기계학습(소박 베일스, KNN과 SVM), 심도학습(NN 장량류모델)과 의사결정 트리 알고리즘의 실현을 바탕으로 한다.', 'sw': 'Inaathirika katika kazi ya Twita imejikita kwenye kuchaguliwa hisia na kutathmini utaratibu kwa kutumia twiti za lugha nyingi (Kiingereza na Kihispania). Katika utafiti huu, seti ya taarifa za SemEval zilitangazwa, kuchaguliwa, na kutathmini kwa namna hiyo (sahihi, kumbukumbu, na uhalisia). Mfumo unaoandikwa katika gazeti hili unategemea utekelezaji wa mafunzo ya mashine yanayofuatiliwa (Naive Bayes, KNN na SVM), kujifunza kwa kina (modeli ya mafua ya NN Tensor), na makubaliano ya miti ya uamuzi.', 'id': "Tugas 'Affect in Tweets' ditengah pada kategorisasi emosi dan matriks evaluasi menggunakan tweet berbagai bahasa (Inggris dan Spanyol). Dalam penelitian ini, set data SemEval Affect telah diproses, dikategorisasikan, dan diteliti sesuai dengan (presisi, ingatan, dan akurasi). Sistem yang diterangkan di kertas ini berdasarkan implementasi pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi (Naive Bayes, KNN dan SVM), pembelajaran dalam (NN Tensor Flow model), dan algoritma pohon keputusan.", 'sq': "The  Affect in Tweets' task is centered on emotions categorization and evaluation matrix using multi-language tweets (English and Spanish).  Në këtë kërkim, grupi i të dhënave SemEval Affect u përgatit, u kategorizua dhe u vlerësua sipas kësaj (saktësia, kujtimi dhe saktësia). Sistemi i përshkruar në këtë letër bazohet në zbatimin e mësimit të mbikqyrur të makinave (Naive Bayes, KNN dhe SVM), mësimit të thellë (NN Tensor Flow model) dhe algoritmeve të pemëve vendimtare.", 'am': 'የTweets ሥራ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች (እንግሊዝኛ እና ስፓኒሽ) ትዊተሮች በመጠቀም በአሳብ ክፍተት እና ማስታወቂያ ማድረጊያውን በመካከለኛ ነው፡፡ In this research, SemEval Affect dataset was preprocessed, categorized, and evaluated accordingly (precision, recall, and accuracy).  በዚህ ፕሮግራም የተዘጋጀው ሲስተምረው፣ የተጠበቀ መሣሪያን ትምህርት (Naive Bayes, KNN እና SVM), ጥልቅ ትምህርት (NN Tensor Flow model) እና የዛፎች አልgoritm በመፍጠር ላይ ነው፡፡', 'hy': "The  Affect in Tweets' task is centered on emotions categorization and evaluation matrix using multi-language tweets (English and Spanish).  In this research, SemEval Affect dataset was preprocessed, categorized, and evaluated accordingly (precision, recall, and accuracy).  The system described in this paper is based on the implementation of supervised machine learning (Naive Bayes, KNN and SVM), deep learning (NN Tensor Flow model), and decision trees algorithms.", 'fa': 'تاثیر در کار تویتها بر ماتریکس تقسیم و ارزیابی احساسات با استفاده از تویتهای متعدد زبان (انگلیسی و اسپانیایی) مرکز شده است. در این تحقیقات، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نیمه\u200cاثرات پیش\u200cپردازی، تقسیم شده و به همین دلیل (دقیق، یادآوری و دقیق) ارزش داده شد. سیستم توصیف شده در این کاغذ بر اساس عملیات یادگیری ماشین تحت نظر (Naive Bayes, KNN and SVM) و یادگیری عمیق (NN Tensor Flow model) و الگوریتم درختان تصمیم گرفته است.', 'bn': 'টুইটের কাজে প্রভাবিত হচ্ছে অনুভূতি বিভাগ এবং মাল্টিভাষা ম্যাট্রিক্স (ইংরেজী এবং স্প্যানিশ) ব্যবহার করে অনুভূতি বিভাগের উপর। এই গবেষণায় সেমইভাল এফেক্ট ডাটাসেট পুরোপুরি প্রক্রিয়া করা হয়, বিভাগ করা হয় এবং তার ফলে মূল্যায়ন করা হয় (সঠিক, মনে রাখা এবং সঠিকভাব এই পত্রিকায় বর্ণনা করা এই ব্যবস্থা নিয়ে ভিত্তিক (নাইভ বেয়াস, কেনএন এবং এসভিএম), গভীর শিক্ষা (এনএন টেনসার ফুল মডেল), এবং সিদ্ধান্ত গাছের আলগরিদম।', 'af': 'Die afvloek in Tweets se taak is sentreer op emosie kategoriseering en evalueringsmatriks met multitaal tweets (Engels en Spaanse). In hierdie ondersoek is SemEval Affect datastel voorprocesseer, kategoriseer en toepassing (presisie, herhaal en presisie) gemaak. Die stelsel beskrywe in hierdie papier is gebaseer op die implementasie van die superviseerde masjien leer (Naive Bayes, KNN en SVM), diep leer (NN Tensor Flow model), en besluit bome algoritme.', 'tr': "Tweets' zadynyň etkisi, duýgular kategoriýasy we çykarma matriksyna görkezildi. Bu barlamada, SemEval faýllary öňünden işledildi, kategoriýaly we munyň dogrylygyna görä deňlendirildi. Bu kagyzda tassyýan edilen sistem gözetli maşynyň öwrenmegi (Naive Bayes, KNN we SVM), gaty öwrenmegi (NN Tensor Flow Modeli) we agaçlar algoritmalaryna daýanýar.", 'bs': 'Učinak u zadatku Tweets je usmjeren na matricu kategorizacije emocija i procjene koristeći višejezičke tweets (engleski i španjolski). U ovom istraživanju je predobrađena, kategorizirana i odgovarajući procjena (preciznost, sjećanje i preciznost). Sistem opisanog u ovom papiru temeljen je na provedbi nadzornog učenja mašina (Naive Bayes, KNN i SVM), dubokog učenja (NN Tensor Flow model) i algoritma drveća odlučenja.', 'et': 'Mõju tweetides ülesanne keskendub emotsioonide kategooriale ja hindamise maatriksile, kasutades mitmekeelseid säutseid (inglise ja hispaania keeles). Selles uuringus eeltöödeldi, kategooriastati ja hinnati SemEval Affecti andmekogumit vastavalt (täpsus, tagasikutsumine ja täpsus). Käesolevas töös kirjeldatud süsteem põhineb juhendatud masinõppe (Naive Bayes, KNN ja SVM), sügavõppe (NN Tensor Flow mudel) ja otsustuspuude algoritmide rakendamisel.', 'cs': 'Úloha Affekt in Tweets je zaměřena na kategorizaci emocí a hodnotící matici pomocí vícejazyčných tweetů (angličtina a španělština). V rámci tohoto výzkumu byla datová sada SemEval Affect předzpracována, kategorizována a odpovídajícím způsobem hodnocena (přesnost, odvolání a přesnost). Systém popsaný v tomto článku je založen na implementaci supervisovaného strojového učení (Naive Bayes, KNN a SVM), hlubokého učení (NN Tensor Flow model) a algoritmů rozhodovacích stromů.', 'ca': 'La tasca "Affect in Tweets" està centrada en la categorització emocional i la matriu d\'evaluació utilitzant tweets multillengües (anglès i espanyol). En aquesta recerca, el conjunt de dades SemEval Affect va ser preprocesat, categoritzat i evaluat en conseqüència (precisió, recuperació i precisió). El sistema descrit en aquest paper es basa en la implementació d\'aprenentatge màquinari supervisat (Naive Bayes, KNN i SVM), aprenentatge profund (NN Tensor Flow model) i algoritmes d\'arbres de decisions.', 'fi': 'Affect in Tweets -tehtävä keskittyy tunteiden luokitteluun ja arviointimatriisiin monikielisten twiittien avulla (englanniksi ja espanjaksi). Tässä tutkimuksessa SemEval Affect -aineisto esiprosessoitiin, kategorioitiin ja arvioitiin sen mukaisesti (tarkkuus, palautus ja tarkkuus). Tässä työssä kuvattu järjestelmä perustuu ohjattuun koneoppimiseen (Naive Bayes, KNN ja SVM), syväoppimiseen (NN Tensor Flow -malli) ja päätöspuualgoritmeihin.', 'az': "Tweets'in iŇüind…ô m√ľxt…ôlif t…ôsirl…ôr √ßoxlu dil tweets (ńįngiliz…ô v…ô ńįspanyolca) il…ô emosiyalar kategoriyasiyasńĪ v…ô deńüerlendirm…ô matrisin…ô m…ôxsus edilir. Bu araŇütńĪrma i√ßind…ô, SemEval Affect veri qurńüularńĪ …ôvv…ôlc…ô iŇül…ôdil…ôr, kategoriyalar edilir v…ô buna g√∂r…ô deńüerl…ôŇüdirildi (d…ôqiqliyyat, yada salmaq v…ô dońürulńĪq). Bu kańüńĪzda tanńĪmlanan sistem, g√∂zl…ôyirli maŇüńĪn √∂yr…ônm…ôsi (Naive Bayes, KNN v…ô SVM), derin √∂yr…ônm…ôsi (NN Tensor Flow Modeli) v…ô karar ańüaclarńĪn algoritminin istifad…ôsin…ô dayanńĪlńĪr.", 'jv': 'Mbak nggambar Ketok Nang Tuwat Nang barêng-barêng iki, sampeyan Mèh Afectt iki dadi wis mulai, dadi, kategorisi lan ngono kuwi nggawe geraksi dadi (dadi, antarané, terus marine). Sistem sing paling nggambaran karo paper iki dadi supoyo sistem kuwi nggawe lanjut cara-cara sing kudu nggunakake sistem bab (Nave bayes, KNN lan SVM), padha uga ngerti (model NN Tentor Flow), lan Algorithm sing berarti.', 'he': 'המשימה של "השפעה בטוויטס" מרוכזת על הקטגוריזציה של רגשות ומטריקס הערכה באמצעות טוויטים רבות שפות (אנגלית וספרדית). במחקר הזה, קבוצת נתונים על השפעה של SemEval הועברה, התייצבה, והערכה בהתאם (מדויק, זיכרון ודיוק). המערכת התוארת בעיתון הזה מבוססת על ההפעלה של לימוד מכונות מפקח (Naive Bayes, KNN ו SVM), לימוד עמוק (NN Tensor Flow model), ואלגוריתם עצי החלטות.', 'sk': 'Naloga Vpliv v tweets je osredotočena na kategorizacijo čustev in matriko ocenjevanja z uporabo večjezičnih tweetov (angleščina in španščina). V tej raziskavi je bil nabor podatkov SemEval Affect predobdelan, kategoriziran in ustrezno ocenjen (natančnost, odpoklic in točnost). Sistem, opisan v tem prispevku, temelji na implementaciji nadzorovanega strojnega učenja (Naive Bayes, KNN in SVM), globokega učenja (NN Tensor Flow model) in algoritmov dreves odločanja.', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis A cikin wannan shirin nan, aka tsẽre, kuma aka rara, kuma aka ƙaddara (taƙaita, tunar, kuma tsari). Ana bayyana shi a cikin wannan takarda, ana ƙayyade shirin karatun na tsari da aka tsare (Naive Bayes, KNN da SvM), da karatun masu ƙaranci (NaN Tesor Guy), da algoritm na takardar itãce.', 'bo': "Tweets' ལས་འགན་འགྱུར་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་དེ། སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་དང་གྲངས་རྩིས་མཐུན་ཡོད། ལྟ་ཞིབ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་SemEval Affect གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་དག་གི་སྔོན་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་དང་། རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་བགོ་བསྟར་ན། The system described in this paper is based on the implementation of supervised machine learning (Naive Bayes, KNN and SVM), deep learning (NN Tensor Flow model), and decision trees algorithms."}
{'en': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'ar': 'THU_NGN في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: تحليل كثافة المشاعر الدقيقة للحبيبات مع اهتمام CNN-LSTM', 'fr': "THU_NGN à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Analyse fine de l'intensité du sentiment des Tweets avec attention CNN-LSTM", 'es': 'THU_NGN en Semeval-2018 Tarea 1: Análisis detallado de la intensidad del sentimiento de los tuits con atención CNN-LSTM', 'pt': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Análise refinada da intensidade do sentimento do Tweet com atenção CNN-LSTM', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のTHU_NGNタスク1 ：注意を払った微細なツイート感情の強度分析CNN - LSTM', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर THU_NGN: ध्यान सीएनएन-LSTM के साथ ठीक-ठाक ट्वीट भावना तीव्रता विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'THU_NGN на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Анализ интенсивности мелкозернистого твита с привлечением внимания CNN-LSTM', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务1者THU_NGN:细粒度之推文情,强于CNN-LSTM', 'ga': 'THU_NGN ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Anailís ar Dhéine an Mheinteacháin le hAirde CNN-LSTM', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Αναλυτική ανάλυση έντασης συναισθημάτων με προσοχή', 'hu': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Finomszemcsés Tweet Érzelmi intenzitás elemzés figyelemmel CNN-LSTM', 'ka': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 1: წარმოადგენული Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'kk': 'THU_NGN at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'lt': 'THU_NGN per 2018 m. pusmetį 1 užduotis: Dėmesio CNN-LSTM intensyvumo analizė su smulkiais grūdais', 'it': "THU_NGN a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Analisi dell'intensità dei sentimenti con attenzione CNN-LSTM", 'mk': 'THU_NGN на SemEval-2018 задача 1: фина анализа на интензитетот на чувството на Твитер со внимание CNN-LSTM', 'ms': 'THU_NGN pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Analisis Intensiti Sensan Tweet-benih dengan Perhatian CNN-LSTM', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1-ല്\u200d THU_NGN: നല്ല- ഗ്രീന്\u200d ട്വീറ്റ് സെന്\u200dറിമെന്\u200dറ് ഇന്\u200dറെന്\u200dറിറ്റിറ്റിറ്റി അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത് CNN-LST', 'mt': 'THU_NGN f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Analiżi ta’ Intensità ta’ Sentiment ta’ Tweet b’Ħruġ Fin b’Attenzjoni CNN-LSTM', 'mn': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'pl': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Delikatna analiza intensywności sentymentów Tweet z uwagą CNN-LSTM', 'no': 'THU_NGN at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'ro': 'THU_NGN la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Analiza intensității sentimentelor Tweet cu granulație fină cu atenție CNN-LSTM', 'sr': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'si': 'THU_NGN at semeval-2018 Job 1: Fine-Graned Tweet Sentiment Intensty විශ්ලේෂණය CNN-LSTM', 'so': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'ta': 'Я«џЯ»єЯ««Я»ЇEval- 2018 Я«фЯ«БЯ«┐', 'sv': 'THU_NGN på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Finkornig Tweet Känslaintensitetsanalys med uppmärksamhet CNN-LSTM', 'ur': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 vazifa 1: Fine- grafted Twitter Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'vi': 'Báo NGN tại SemEvl-208 Task 1: Intensity Analysis thất bại hoàn hảo với Chú ý CNN-LSTM', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Анализ на интензивността на сентимента с внимание', 'nl': 'THU_NGN op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Fijnkorrelige Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analyse met Aandacht CNN-LSTM', 'hr': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis s Attention CNN-LSTM', 'da': 'THU_NGN på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Finkornet Tweet Følelsesintensitetsanalyse med opmærksomhed CNN-LSTM', 'de': 'THU_NGN auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Feingranulare Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analyse mit Aufmerksamkeit CNN-LSTM', 'id': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'ko': 'THU NGN이SemEval-18 퀘스트 1: CNN-LSTM의 세립도 트위터 정서 강도 분석에 주목', 'fa': 'THU', 'tr': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'sw': 'THU_NGN kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Uchambuzi wa Ujumbe wa Twita unaotumiwa vizuri kwa hisia za CNN-LSTM', 'sq': 'THU_NGN në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'af': 'THU_NGN by SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensiteit Analyseer met Aangaande CNN-LSTM', 'am': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'hy': 'THU_NCN-ը, 2018 թվականի կենտրոնում. առաջին խնդիր՝ լավ հագուստված թվիթ զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության վերլուծություն, ուշադրություն դարձնելով CNN-LStm', 'az': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'bs': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'ca': 'THU_NGN a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'cs': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Jemnozrnná analýza intenzity sentimentů s pozorností CNN-LSTM', 'et': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Peeneteraline Tweet Sentimendi intensiivsuse analüüs koos tähelepanuga CNN-LSTM', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ১-এ থিউ_NGN: সিএনএন-এলস্টিমেন্টের সাথে ভালো গ্রেফতার করা টুইট সেন্টিমেন্ট ইনসেটিমেন্টি বিশ্লেষণ', 'fi': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Hienorakeinen Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'jv': 'thoU', 'he': 'THU_NGN ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: Analysis of Fine-Grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity with Attention CNN-LSTM', 'sk': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Drobnozrnata analiza intenzivnosti čustev Tweet s pozornostjo CNN-LSTM', 'ha': 'AII', 'bo': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Fine-grained Tweet Sentiment Intensity Analysis with Attention CNN-LSTM'}
{'en': 'Traditional sentiment analysis approaches mainly focus on classifying the sentiment polarities or emotion categories of texts. However, they ca n’t exploit the sentiment intensity information. Therefore, the SemEval-2018 Task 1 is aimed to automatically determine the intensity of emotions or sentiment of tweets to mine fine-grained sentiment information. In order to address this task, we propose a system based on an attention CNN-LSTM model. In our model, LSTM is used to extract the long-term contextual information from texts. We apply attention techniques to selecting this information. A CNN layer with different size of kernels is used to extract local features. The dense layers take the pooled CNN feature maps and predict the intensity scores. Our system reaches average Pearson correlation score of 0.722 (ranked 12/48) in emotion intensity regression task, and 0.810 in valence regression task (ranked 15/38). It indicates that our system can be further extended.', 'ar': 'تركز مناهج تحليل المشاعر التقليدية بشكل أساسي على تصنيف استقطاب المشاعر أو فئات العاطفة للنصوص. ومع ذلك ، لا يمكنهم استغلال معلومات حدة المشاعر. لذلك ، تهدف مهمة SemEval-2018 1 إلى تحديد شدة الانفعالات أو مشاعر التغريدات تلقائيًا لتعدين معلومات المشاعر الدقيقة. من أجل معالجة هذه المهمة ، نقترح نظامًا يعتمد على نموذج الاهتمام CNN-LSTM. في نموذجنا ، يتم استخدام LSTM لاستخراج المعلومات السياقية طويلة المدى من النصوص. نطبق تقنيات الانتباه لاختيار هذه المعلومات. يتم استخدام طبقة CNN ذات أحجام مختلفة من النواة لاستخراج المعالم المحلية. تأخذ الطبقات الكثيفة خرائط ميزات CNN المجمعة وتتوقع درجات الكثافة. يصل نظامنا إلى متوسط درجة ارتباط بيرسون 0.722 (المرتبة 12/48) في مهمة انحدار كثافة العاطفة ، و 0.810 في مهمة انحدار التكافؤ (المرتبة 15/38). إنه يشير إلى أنه يمكن توسيع نظامنا بشكل أكبر.', 'es': 'Los enfoques tradicionales de análisis de sentimientos se centran principalmente en clasificar las polaridades de los sentimientos o las categorías de emociones de los textos. Sin embargo, no pueden aprovechar la información sobre la intensidad de los sentimientos. Por lo tanto, la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018 tiene como objetivo determinar automáticamente la intensidad de las emociones o el sentimiento de los tuits para extraer información detallada de los sentimientos. Para abordar esta tarea, proponemos un sistema basado en un modelo de atención CNN-LSTM. En nuestro modelo, LSTM se utiliza para extraer la información contextual a largo plazo de los textos. Aplicamos técnicas de atención para seleccionar esta información. Se utiliza una capa de CNN con núcleos de diferente tamaño para extraer entidades locales. Las capas densas toman los mapas de funciones de CNN agrupados y predicen las puntuaciones de intensidad. Nuestro sistema alcanza un puntaje promedio de correlación de Pearson de 0.722 (clasificado 12/48) en la tarea de regresión de intensidad emocional, y 0.810 en la tarea de regresión de valencia (clasificado 15/38). Indica que nuestro sistema puede ampliarse aún más.', 'fr': "Les approches traditionnelles d'analyse des sentiments se concentrent principalement sur la classification des polarités des sentiments ou des catégories d'émotions des textes. Cependant, ils ne peuvent pas exploiter les informations sur l'intensité du sentiment. Par conséquent, la tâche 1 de SemeVal-2018 vise à déterminer automatiquement l'intensité des émotions ou des sentiments des tweets afin d'extraire des informations de sentiment précises. Afin de répondre à cette tâche, nous proposons un système basé sur un modèle d'attention CNN-LSTM. Dans notre modèle, LSTM est utilisé pour extraire les informations contextuelles à long terme des textes. Nous appliquons des techniques d'attention pour sélectionner ces informations. Une couche CNN avec différentes tailles de noyaux est utilisée pour extraire les entités locales. Les couches denses prennent les cartes d'entités CNN regroupées et prédisent les scores d'intensité. Notre système atteint le score moyen de corrélation de Pearson de 0,722 (classé 12/48) dans la tâche de régression d'intensité émotionnelle et de 0,810 dans la tâche de régression de valence (classée 15/38). Cela indique que notre système peut encore être étendu.", 'pt': 'As abordagens tradicionais de análise de sentimentos concentram-se principalmente na classificação das polaridades de sentimento ou categorias de emoção dos textos. No entanto, eles não podem explorar as informações de intensidade do sentimento. Portanto, a Tarefa 1 do SemEval-2018 visa determinar automaticamente a intensidade das emoções ou sentimentos dos tweets para extrair informações de sentimento refinadas. Para resolver esta tarefa, propomos um sistema baseado em um modelo CNN-LSTM de atenção. Em nosso modelo, o LSTM é usado para extrair as informações contextuais de longo prazo dos textos. Aplicamos técnicas de atenção para selecionar essas informações. Uma camada CNN com diferentes tamanhos de kernels é usada para extrair recursos locais. As camadas densas pegam os mapas de recursos da CNN agrupados e preveem as pontuações de intensidade. Nosso sistema atinge a pontuação média de correlação de Pearson de 0,722 (classificada em 12/48) na tarefa de regressão de intensidade de emoção e 0,810 na tarefa de regressão de valência (classificada em 15/38). Isso indica que nosso sistema pode ser estendido ainda mais.', 'ja': '伝統的な感情分析アプローチは、主にテキストの感情極性または感情カテゴリの分類に焦点を当てている。しかし、感情の強さの情報を利用することはできません。したがって、SemEval -2018タスク1は、微細な感情情報をマイニングするための感情または感情の強度を自動的に決定することを目的としています。この課題に対処するため、CNN - LSTMモデルに基づくシステムを提案します。私たちのモデルでは、LSTMはテキストから長期的な文脈情報を抽出するために使用されます。この情報の選択には注意を払うテクニックが適用されます。異なるサイズのカーネルを有するＣＮＮ層を使用して、ローカル特徴を抽出する。高密度層は、プールされたＣＮＮ特徴マップを取り出し、強度スコアを予測する。私たちのシステムは、感情強度回帰タスクでは0.722 （ 12/48ランク）、原子価回帰タスクでは0.810 （ 15/38ランク）の平均ピアソン相関スコアに達します。私たちのシステムをさらに拡張できることを示しています。', 'hi': 'पारंपरिक भावना विश्लेषण दृष्टिकोण मुख्य रूप से ग्रंथों की भावना ध्रुवीयता या भावना श्रेणियों को वर्गीकृत करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हालांकि, वे भावना की तीव्रता की जानकारी का फायदा नहीं उठा सकते हैं। इसलिए, SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 का उद्देश्य स्वचालित रूप से भावनाओं की तीव्रता या ट्वीट्स की भावनाओं की तीव्रता को निर्धारित करना है, जो ठीक-ठाक भावना जानकारी को ठीक करने के लिए है। इस कार्य को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एक ध्यान सीएनएन-एलएसटीएम मॉडल के आधार पर एक प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल में, LSTM का उपयोग ग्रंथों से दीर्घकालिक प्रासंगिक जानकारी निकालने के लिए किया जाता है। हम इस जानकारी का चयन करने के लिए ध्यान तकनीकों को लागू करते हैं। स्थानीय सुविधाओं को निकालने के लिए गुठली के विभिन्न आकार के साथ एक सीएनएन परत का उपयोग किया जाता है। घने परतों pooled सीएनएन सुविधा नक्शे लेने और तीव्रता स्कोर की भविष्यवाणी. हमारी प्रणाली भावना तीव्रता प्रतिगमन कार्य में 0.722 (12/48 रैंक) के औसत पियर्सन सहसंबंध स्कोर तक पहुंचती है, और वैलेंस प्रतिगमन कार्य में 0.810 (15/38 रैंक)। यह इंगित करता है कि हमारे सिस्टम को आगे बढ़ाया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'Традиционные подходы к анализу настроений в основном направлены на классификацию полярностей настроений или категорий эмоций текстов. Однако они не могут использовать информацию об интенсивности настроений. Поэтому задача 1 SemEval-2018 направлена на автоматическое определение интенсивности эмоций или настроений твитов для майнинга мелкозернистой информации настроений. Для решения этой задачи мы предлагаем систему, основанную на модели внимания CNN-LSTM. В нашей модели LSTM используется для извлечения долгосрочной контекстной информации из текстов. При отборе этой информации мы применяем методы внимания. Для извлечения локальных признаков используют слой CNN с разным размером ядер. Плотные слои принимают объединенные карты характеристик CNN и предсказывают баллы интенсивности. Наша система достигает среднего балла корреляции Пирсона 0,722 (рейтинг 12/48) в задаче регрессии интенсивности эмоций и 0,810 в задаче валентной регрессии (рейтинг 15/38). Это указывает на то, что наша система может быть расширена.', 'zh': '古之情分析方法主侧重于文本之情极性情之类也。 但不能用情强度信息。 是以SemEval-2018务1意在自强推文之情,以发细粒度之情。 为此一事,立一CNN-LSTM统。 于我模形中,LSTM取久上下文息。 吾当注意技巧以择之。 有大小内核 CNN 重以取地。 密图层用并 CNN 特征图并占强度分数。 情强归职皮尔逊得分0.722(名12/48),效价归至0.810(15/38)。 明吾统可以益广也。', 'ga': 'Díríonn cineálacha cur chuige traidisiúnta um anailísiú mothúcháin go príomha ar aicmiú a dhéanamh ar pholarachtaí meon nó ar chatagóirí mothúcháin na dtéacsanna. Mar sin féin, ní féidir leo leas a bhaint as faisnéis déine na meon. Mar sin, tá Tasc 1 SemEval-2018 dírithe ar dhéine na mothúchán nó meon na dtvuíteanna a chinneadh go huathoibríoch chun faisnéis meon mínghlan a mhianaigh. Chun dul i ngleic leis an tasc seo, molaimid córas bunaithe ar mhúnla aird CNN-LSTM. Inár múnla, úsáidtear LSTM chun an fhaisnéis chomhthéacsúil fhadtéarmach a bhaint as téacsanna. Cuirimid teicníochtaí aird i bhfeidhm chun an fhaisnéis seo a roghnú. Úsáidtear ciseal CNN le méideanna éagsúla eithne chun gnéithe áitiúla a bhaint as. Tógann na sraitheanna dlúth na léarscáileanna gné CNN comhthiomsaithe agus déanann siad na scóir déine a thuar. Sroicheann ár gcóras meánscór comhghaolaithe Pearson de 0.722 (rangaithe 12/48) i dtasc aischéimniúcháin déine na mothúchán, agus 0.810 i dtasc aischéimniúcháin valence (rangaithe 15/38). Tugann sé le fios gur féidir ár gcóras a leathnú tuilleadh.', 'hu': 'A hagyományos érzelmi elemzési megközelítések elsősorban a szövegek érzelmi polaritásainak vagy érzelmi kategóriáinak osztályozására összpontosítanak. Azonban nem használhatják ki az érzelmek intenzitására vonatkozó információkat. Ezért a SemEval-2018 feladat 1 célja, hogy automatikusan meghatározza a tweetek érzelmeinek vagy érzelmeinek intenzitását, hogy finom szemcséjű érzelmi információkat bányásszon. Ennek a feladatnak a megoldása érdekében egy figyelemre méltó CNN-LSTM modellre épülő rendszert javasolunk. Modellünkben az LSTM-t használjuk a hosszú távú kontextuális információk kivonására szövegekből. Figyelem technikákat alkalmazunk ezen információk kiválasztására. Egy különböző méretű CNN réteget használnak a helyi funkciók kivonására. A sűrű rétegek az összesített CNN funkciótérképeket veszik és előrejelzik az intenzitási pontszámokat. Rendszerünk az érzelmi intenzitás regressziós feladatban 0,722 (12/48) Pearson korrelációs pontszámot ér el, a valencia regressziós feladatban pedig 0,810 (15/38) értéket ér el. Ez azt jelzi, hogy a rendszerünk tovább bővíthető.', 'el': 'Οι παραδοσιακές προσεγγίσεις ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων επικεντρώνονται κυρίως στην ταξινόμηση των πολικότητας συναισθημάτων ή των κατηγοριών συναισθημάτων των κειμένων. Ωστόσο, δεν μπορούν να εκμεταλλευτούν τις πληροφορίες έντασης συναισθημάτων. Ως εκ τούτου, η εργασία έχει ως στόχο να καθορίσει αυτόματα την ένταση των συναισθημάτων ή του συναισθήματος των tweets για την εξόρυξη λεπτόκοκκων πληροφοριών συναισθημάτων. Προκειμένου να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το έργο, προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα βασισμένο σε ένα μοντέλο προσοχής. Στο μοντέλο μας, χρησιμοποιείται για την εξαγωγή των μακροπρόθεσμων πληροφοριών περιβάλλοντος από κείμενα. Εφαρμόζουμε τεχνικές προσοχής στην επιλογή αυτών των πληροφοριών. Ένα στρώμα με διαφορετικό μέγεθος πυρήνων χρησιμοποιείται για την εξαγωγή τοπικών χαρακτηριστικών. Τα πυκνά στρώματα λαμβάνουν τους συγκεντρωμένους χάρτες χαρακτηριστικών και προβλέπουν τις βαθμολογίες έντασης. Το σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει τη μέση βαθμολογία συσχέτισης Pearson 0.722 (κατάταξη 12/48) στην εργασία παλινδρόμησης έντασης συναισθημάτων και 0.810 στην εργασία παλινδρόμησης παλινδρόμησης (κατάταξη 15/38). Δείχνει ότι το σύστημά μας μπορεί να επεκταθεί περαιτέρω.', 'ka': 'ტრადიციონალური სენტიმენტის ანალიზიციის გარეშე სენტიმენტის პოლარიტის ან ემოციონალური ტექსტის კატეგორიზების კლასიფიკაციაზე გარეშე. მაგრამ ისინი არ შეუძლიათ გამოიყენოთ ინტენსტივის ინფორმაციას. ამიტომ, SemEval-2018 დავალება 1-ის მიზეზია ავტომატურად განსაზღვრება ემოციების ინტენსტივის ან ტვირთა სენტიმენტის ინტენსტივის ჩემი სენტიმენტის ინფორმაციას. ამ დავალების შესახებისთვის, ჩვენ შევძლებთ სისტემის შესახებ CNN-LSTM მოდელზე. ჩვენი მოდელში LSTM გამოყენება ტექსტიდან ძალიან სიგრძნელი ინფორმაციის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ამ ინფორმაციის ამორჩევისთვის აყენებთ ინტექნოციის ტექნოგიები. Name სამყარო სინაცემები CNN ფუნქტურების შესახებ და ინტენსტივის შესახებ. ჩვენი სისტემა მიიღება საშუალო პერსონის კორელაციის მონაცემები 0,722-ის (რედანტირებული 12/48) ემოციონის ინტენსტიური რეგრესიის მონაცემებში და 0,810-ს ვალენსი რეგრესიის მონაცემებში ( ჩვენი სისტემა შეიძლება უფრო მეტი გაფარდება.', 'it': "Gli approcci tradizionali di analisi sentimentale si concentrano principalmente sulla classificazione delle polarità sentimentali o delle categorie emotive dei testi. Tuttavia, non possono sfruttare le informazioni sull'intensità del sentiment. Pertanto, il Task 1 di SemEval-2018 mira a determinare automaticamente l'intensità delle emozioni o del sentimento dei tweet per estrarre informazioni di sentimento a grana fine. Per affrontare questo compito, proponiamo un sistema basato su un modello di attenzione CNN-LSTM. Nel nostro modello, LSTM viene utilizzato per estrarre le informazioni contestuali a lungo termine dai testi. Applichiamo tecniche di attenzione alla selezione di queste informazioni. Un livello CNN con diverse dimensioni di kernel viene utilizzato per estrarre le caratteristiche locali. Gli strati densi prendono le mappe combinate delle funzionalità CNN e predicono i punteggi di intensità. Il nostro sistema raggiunge il punteggio medio di correlazione Pearson di 0,722 (classificato 12/48) nel compito di regressione dell'intensità emotiva e di 0,810 nel compito di regressione della valenza (classificato 15/38). Indica che il nostro sistema può essere ulteriormente esteso.", 'lt': 'Traditional sentiment analysis approaches mainly focus on classifying the sentiment polarities or emotion categories of texts.  Tačiau jie negali pasinaudoti jausmų intensyvumo informacija. Todėl 1-oji užduotis „SemEval-2018“ skirta automatiškai nustatyti emocijų intensyvumą arba tweetų jausmą, skirtą minėti smulkiai apdorotą jausmą. Siekiant išspręsti šią užduotį, siūlome sistemą, pagrįstą dėmesio CNN-LSTM modeliu. Mūsų modelyje LSTM naudojamas ištraukti ilgalaikę kontekstinę informaciją iš tekstų. Šią informaciją pasirinkdami taikome dėmesio metodus. Siekiant išgauti vietines savybes naudojamas CNN sluoksnis, kurio dydis yra skirtingas branduolių. tankūs sluoksniai paima bendrus CNN požymių žemėlapius ir numato intensyvumo rezultatus. Mūsų sistema pasiekia vidutinį Pearson koreliacijos tašką 0,722 (12/48 laipsnio) emocinio intensyvumo regresijos užduotyje ir 0,810 valencijos regresijos užduotyje (15/38 laipsnio). Tai rodo, kad mūsų sistema gali būti toliau išplėsta.', 'kk': 'Дәстүрлі сезімдердің анализациясы негізінде мәтіндердің сезімдердің полариттері не эмоциялық санаттарын классификациялауға көмектеседі. Бірақ олар сезімдік теңдік мәліметін қолдануға болмайды. Сондықтан, 1-нің SemEval-2018 тапсырмасы автоматты түрде эмоциялардың көпшілігін немесе tweets сезімінің көпшілігін мақсат етеді. Бұл тапсырманы шешу үшін CNN-LSTM үлгісіне негізделген жүйені таңдаймыз. Біздің үлгімізде, LSTM мәтіндерден ұзындық контексті мәліметті шығару үшін қолданылады. Біз бұл мәліметті таңдау үшін қызықтық техникаларды қолданамыз. Жергілікті мүмкіндіктерді тарқату үшін CNN қабатты түзету көлемі қолданылады. Жатық қабаттар CNN функцияларының карталарын алып, қанықтық нәтижелерін алдын алады. Біздің жүйеміз орташа Персондың корелациясы 0,722 (12/48 ретінде) эмоциялық регрессиялық тапсырмасына жеткізеді, және 0,810 көлемі регрессиялық тапсырмасына (15/38 ретінде) жеткізеді. Бұл біздің жүйеміздің көтеріліп жатқанын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Analisis perasaan tradisional mendekati terutamanya fokus pada mengklasifikasi polariti perasaan atau kategori emosi teks. Namun, mereka tidak boleh mengeksploitasi maklumat intensiti perasaan. Oleh itu, SemEval-2018 Tugas 1 bertujuan untuk menentukan secara automatik intensiti emosi atau perasaan tweet untuk maklumat perasaan yang sempurna. Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami cadangkan sistem berdasarkan model CNN-LSTM perhatian. Dalam model kami, LSTM digunakan untuk mengekstrak maklumat kontekstual jangka panjang dari teks. We apply attention techniques to selecting this information.  Lapisan CNN dengan saiz berbeza kernel digunakan untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri setempat. Lapisan tebal mengambil peta ciri CNN berkumpul dan meramalkan skor intensiti. Sistem kita mencapai skor korelasi Pearson rata-rata 0.722 (berturut 12/48) dalam tugas regresi intensiti emosi, dan 0.810 dalam tugas regresi valensi (berturut 15/38). Ia menunjukkan bahawa sistem kita boleh diperluaskan lebih lanjut.', 'mk': 'Традиционалната анализа на чувствата се приближува главно на класификацијата на поларитетите на чувствата или на категориите на емоции на текстите. Сепак, тие не можат да ја искористат информацијата за интензитетот на чувствата. Затоа, Првата задача SemEval-2018 има за цел автоматски да ја одреди интензитетот на емоциите или чувството на твитови за минирање на информации за добри чувства. За да ја решиме оваа задача, предложуваме систем базиран на вниманието на моделот CNN-LSTM. Во нашиот модел, LSTM се користи за извлекување на долгорочните контекстуални информации од текстови. Ние применуваме техники на внимание за изборот на оваа информација. За извлекување локални карактеристики се користи CNN слој со различна големина на јадри. Густите слоеви ги земаат заедничките мапи на CNN карактеристики и ги предвидуваат оценките на интензитетот. Our system reaches average Pearson correlation score of 0.722 (ranked 12/48) in emotion intensity regression task, and 0.810 in valence regression task (ranked 15/38).  Тоа покажува дека нашиот систем може да се продолжи.', 'mt': "L-approċċi tradizzjonali tal-analiżi tas-sentimenti jiffokaw prinċipalment fuq il-klassifikazzjoni tal-polaritajiet tas-sentimenti jew tal-kategoriji emozzjonali tat-testi. However, they can't exploit the sentiment intensity information.  Għalhekk, is-SemEval-2018 Task 1 għandu l-għan li jiddetermina awtomatikament l-intensità tal-emozzjonijiet jew is-sensazzjoni ta’ tweets biex tinbena informazzjoni dwar is-sensazzjoni fina. Sabiex nindirizzaw dan il-kompitu, nipproponu sistema bbażata fuq mudell ta’ attenzjoni CNN-LSTM. Fil-mudell tagħna, l-LSTM jintuża biex tiġi estratta l-informazzjoni kuntestwali fit-tul mit-testi. Aħna napplikaw tekniki ta’ attenzjoni għall-għażla ta’ din l-informazzjoni. A CNN layer with different size of kernels is used to extract local features.  Is-saffi densi jieħdu l-mapep tal-karatteristiċi CNN miġbura flimkien u jipprevedu l-punteġġi tal-intensità. Is-sistema tagħna tilħaq punteġġ medju ta’ korrelazzjoni Pearson ta’ 0.722 (klassifikat 12/48) f’kompitu ta’ rigressjoni tal-intensità emozzjonali, u 0.810 f’kompitu ta’ rigressjoni tal-valenza (klassifikat 15/38). Dan jindika li s-sistema tagħna tista’ tiġi estiża aktar.", 'ml': 'പാരമ്പര്യമായ അനുഭവവിശ്വാസം പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു വികാരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വികാരങ്ങളെയോ വികാരങ്ങള എന്നാലും, അവര്\u200dക്ക് വിചാരപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല. അതുകൊണ്ട്, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1 എന്\u200dറെ സുന്ദരമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയെ വിവരമറിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, സിഎന്\u200d-എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിം മോഡലിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് നാം പ്രൊദ ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലില്\u200d, LSTM ലേഖനിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നീണ്ട ദീര്\u200dഘായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതാണ്. ഈ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. കെര്\u200dനെലുകളുടെ വലിപ്പം വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഒരു സിഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200d സ്റ്റേയര്\u200d ലോക്കല്\u200d ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d എടുക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗ ആഴങ്ങളുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള അടുത്തുള്ള സിഎന്\u200dഎനിന്\u200dറെ ഗുണഗണങ്ങളുടെ മാപ്പുകള്\u200d എടുക്കുകയും കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200dസ ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d സാധാരണ പെയാര്\u200dസണ്\u200d കോര്\u200dട്ടിക്കോര്\u200dട്ട്രേഷന്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തുന്നത് 0. 722 (ചേര്\u200dന്ന 12/48) വികാരത്തിന്റെ വികാരത്തില്\u200d ഉള നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശാലമാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു.', 'no': 'Name Dei kan imidlertid ikkje bruka sentimentintensitetsinformasjonen. Derfor er oppgåva 1 for semiEval-2018 målet å automatisk bestemme intensiteten av emosjonar eller følelsen av tweeter til minne fyrste sentimentsinformasjon. For å adressa denne oppgåva, foreslår vi eit systemet basert på eit oppmerksomslag CNN-LSTM-modell. I modellen vår vert LSTM brukt for å pakka ut den langsiktige kontekstinformasjonen frå tekstar. Vi bruker oppmerksteknikk til å velja denne informasjonen. Ein CNN-lag med ulike storleik på kjerner vert brukt for å pakka ut lokale funksjonar. Den tette lagene tar dei poorte CNN-funksjonskarta og foregå intensitetspoeng. Sistemet vårt når gjennomsnittlig Pearson-korrelasjonspoeng av 0,722 (rankert 12/48) i oppgåva for regresjon av emosjonsintensitet, og 0,810 i valens regresjonsverkt (rankert 15/38). Det tyder på at systemet vårt kan utvidast lenger.', 'pl': 'Tradycyjne metody analizy sentymentów koncentrują się głównie na klasyfikacji polaryzacji sentymentów lub kategorii emocji tekstów. Nie mogą jednak wykorzystać informacji o intensywności sentymentów. Dlatego SemEval-2018 Task 1 ma na celu automatyczne określenie intensywności emocji lub sentymentu tweetów w celu wydobycia drobnoziarnistych informacji sentymentów. Aby sprostać temu zadaniu, proponujemy system oparty na modelu uwagi CNN-LSTM. W naszym modelu LSTM służy do wydobycia długoterminowych informacji kontekstowych z tekstów. Stosujemy techniki uwagi do wyboru tych informacji. Warstwa CNN o różnej wielkości jąder jest używana do wyodrębniania lokalnych cech. Gęste warstwy biorą zbiorowe mapy cech CNN i przewidują wyniki intensywności. Nasz system osiąga średni wynik korelacji Pearsona 0,722 (ranking 12/48) w zadaniu regresji intensywności emocji, a 0,810 w zadaniu regresji walencji (ranking 15/38). Oznacza to, że nasz system może być dalej rozbudowany.', 'mn': 'Энгийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ нь ихэвчлэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төвшин эсвэл сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төрлийн хэлбэрийг ангид ангид хандуулдаг. Гэвч тэд мэдрэмжтэй мэдээллийг ашиглаж чадахгүй. Тиймээс SemEval-2018 Task 1 нь сэтгэл хөдлөл, мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжүүдийг автоматаар тодорхойлох зорилго юм. Энэ ажлыг зохиохын тулд бид CNN-LSTM загварын үндсэн системийг санал болно. Бидний загвар дээр LSTM нь урт хугацааны контекст мэдээллийг текстээс гаргахад хэрэглэгддэг. Бид энэ мэдээллийг сонгохын тулд анхаарлын технологийг ашигладаг. Төмөр хэмжээтэй CNN давхар нь орон нутгийн боломжуудыг гаргахад хэрэглэгддэг. Мөнгөн давхар нь цуглуулсан CNN-ийн газрын зураг аваад хүчирхэг тоонуудыг таамагладаг. Бидний систем Персон хоорондын дундаж 0.722 (12/48 дүрслэлтэй) сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөлийн даалгаврын даалгаврын дундаж хэмжээнд хүрч чадна. 0.810 нь тэнцүү сэтгэл хөдлөлийн даалгаврын даал Энэ нь бидний систем нэмэгдэж чадна гэсэн үг.', 'ro': 'Abordările tradiționale de analiză a sentimentelor se concentrează în principal pe clasificarea polarităților sentimentale sau a categoriilor emoționale ale textelor. Cu toate acestea, ei nu pot exploata informațiile despre intensitatea sentimentelor. Prin urmare, SemEval-2018 Task 1 are ca scop determinarea automată a intensității emoțiilor sau sentimentului tweet-urilor pentru a extrage informații fine de sentiment. Pentru a aborda această sarcină, propunem un sistem bazat pe un model de atenție CNN-LSTM. În modelul nostru, LSTM este folosit pentru a extrage informațiile contextuale pe termen lung din texte. Aplicăm tehnici de atenție la selectarea acestor informații. Un strat CNN cu dimensiuni diferite de nuclee este folosit pentru a extrage caracteristicile locale. Straturile dense iau hărțile combinate ale caracteristicilor CNN și prezic scorurile de intensitate. Sistemul nostru atinge scorul mediu de corelație Pearson de 0.722 (clasat 12/48) în sarcina de regresie a intensității emoționale și 0.810 în sarcina de regresie a valenței (clasat 15/38). Indică faptul că sistemul nostru poate fi extins în continuare.', 'sr': 'Tradicionalna analiza sentimenta približava se uglavnom fokusiranjem na klasifikaciju polaritija sentimenta ili kategorija teksta emocija. Međutim, ne mogu iskoristiti informacije o intenzitetu sentimenta. Stoga, zadatak 1 od semiEval-2018 je usmjeren da automatski utvrdi intenzitet emocija ili osećanja tweeta na informacije o mojim zgodnim osećanjima. Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem na osnovu pažnje CNN-LSTM model. U našem modelu, LSTM se koristi za izvlačenje dugoročnih kontekstualnih informacija iz teksta. Primjenjujemo pažnju tehnike da izaberemo ove informacije. CNN sloj sa različitim veličinom kernela se koristi za izvlačenje lokalnih karakteristika. Gusti slojevi uzimaju zajedničke mape CNN-a i predviđaju rezultate intenziteta. Naš sistem postiže prosječni korelacijski rezultat Pearsona od 0,722 (redovno 12/48) u zadatku regresije emocionalne intenzitete, i 0,810 u zadatku valencijske regresije (redovno 15/38). To ukazuje da naš sistem može biti produžen dalje.', 'so': 'Analysiga xisaabta caadiga ah wuxuu u soo dhowaadaa sida ugu horeysa kalsoonaanta u kala soocaynta arimaha dareenka ama kooxo farshaxanka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee ma isticmaali karaan macluumaadka faa’iidada. Sababtaas darteed Shaqada 1 ee SemEval-2018 waxaa loogu talogalay in ay si automatic ah u go’aan dhaqdhaqaaqnimada fikrada ama fekerka tweetka macluumaadkayga la xiriiray. Si a an u qabsado shaqadaas, waxaan soo jeedaynaa nidaam oo ku saleysan qaab loo jeedo CNN-LSTM. Tusaale ahaan LSTM waxaa looga isticmaalaa in macluumaadka joogtada ah laga soo bixiyo qoraalka. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qalabka caafimaadka si aan u dooranno macluumaadkan. Layer CNN oo ku yaal tiro kala duduwan kernel waxaa loo isticmaalaa in la soo bixiyo qalab deegaan ah. Qalalka qarada hoose waxay qaadaan kartooyinka gaarka ah ee CNN, waxayna sii sheegaan scoraha koronta ah. nidaamkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa heer la xiriira Pearson oo ah 0.722 (ranked 12/48) oo lagu sameeyo xisaabta deeqsinimada, iyo 0.810 oo ku qoran shaqo la kordhiyo (ranked 15/38). It indicates that our system can be further extended.', 'sv': 'Traditionella synsätt på sentimentalanalys fokuserar främst på att klassificera sentimentalpolariteter eller känslokategorier i texter. Men de kan inte utnyttja informationen om sentimentintensitet. Därför syftar SemEval-2018 Task 1 till att automatiskt bestämma intensiteten av känslor eller känslor i tweets för att gruva finkornig sentimentinformation. För att hantera denna uppgift föreslår vi ett system baserat på en uppmärksamhetsmodell CNN-LSTM. I vår modell används LSTM för att extrahera den långsiktiga kontextuella informationen från texter. Vi använder uppmärksamhetstekniker för att välja denna information. Ett CNN-lager med olika kärnstorlek används för att extrahera lokala funktioner. De täta lagren tar de poolade CNN-funktionskartorna och förutspår intensitetspoängen. Vårt system uppnår genomsnittlig Pearson korrelationspoäng på 0,722 (rankad 12/48) i känslointensitetsregressionsuppgift, och 0,810 i valensressionsuppgift (rankad 15/38). Det indikerar att vårt system kan utökas ytterligare.', 'ta': 'பாரம்பரிய உணர்வு ஆய்வு முக்கியமாக உரைகளின் உணர்வு வகைகளை வகைப்படுத்தும் உணர்வு வகைகளை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது. ஆனால், அவர்கள் உணர்வு கூட்டும் தகவலை பயன்படுத்த முடியாது. அதனால், SemEval-2018 பணி 1 என்னுடைய நன்றாக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு தகவலுக்கு தானாகவே உணர்வுகள் அல்லது இருக்கும் உணர்வுகளின் உயரத்தை தீர்மானிக்கும். இந்த பணியை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, CNN-LSTM மாதிரியை அடிப்படையில் நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். எங்கள் மாதிரியில், LSTM உரைகளில் இருந்து நீண்ட நிலையான தற்கால தகவலை வெளியேற்ற பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. இந்த தகவலை தேர்ந்தெடுப்பதற்கான கவனம் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை நாம் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். Name அடர்த்தி அடுக்குகள் pooled CNN குணங்கள் வரைப்படங்களை எடுத்து அதிக மதிப்பெண்களை முன்வாக்குகிறது. எங்கள் கணினியின் சராசரி பீர்சன் இணைப்பு score of 0. 722 (ranked 12/48) in emotion intensity repression task, and 0. 810 in valence regression task (ranked 15/38). அது எங்கள் கணினியை மேலும் விரிவாக்க முடியும் என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது.', 'si': 'පාරමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්ලේෂණය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා විශ්ලේෂණ ඒත් ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න බැහැ දැනුම් තියෙන තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. ඉතින්, සේම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 1 ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවෙන් තියෙන්නේ මගේ හොඳ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තොරතුරු විදියට තියෙන්න මේ වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න, අපි පද්ධතියක් CNN-LSTM මොඩල් එකක් අධාරිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අපේ මොඩේල් එකේ LSTM පාළුවන් වලින් ලොකු කාලේ සංවේදනය තොරතුරු අරගෙන යන්න පාවිච්චි කරනවා. අපි මේ තොරතුරු තෝරාගන්න අවධානය විද්\u200dයාව අවසර කරන්න. ස්ථානික විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන CNN ස්ථානික විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. ගුණු ස්ථානයක් සම්බන්ධ CNN විශේෂතාව සැකසුම් ගන්නවා ඒ වගේම උණ්ඩ ස්කෝර් විශේෂ කරන්න. අපේ පද්ධතිය පර්සන් සාමාන්\u200dය පර්සන් සම්බන්ධ වැඩ 0.722 (රැක්ස් 12/48) ගැන හැඟීමත් ප්\u200dරශ්න වැඩේ සැලසුම් වෙනුවෙන්, 0.810 විශ්වාසික ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය තවත් වැඩි වැඩි කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'ur': 'سنتی احساسات تحقیقات کی تقریباً متصل ہوتی ہے کہ احساسات قطعات یا احساسات قطعات کی کلاس کے ذریعہ تغییر کرتی ہے۔ لیکن وہ احساسات شدید معلومات کو استعمال نہیں کر سکتے۔ لہٰذا، سیم ایولی-2018 ٹاکس ۱ کی تابع کی تابع ہے اپنے ساتھ اپنے ذریعہ سے احساسات یا ٹویٹ کی احساسات کی تنگی کا فیصلہ کرنا چاہتا ہے. اس کام کے بارے میں ہم ایک سیسٹم کی پیشنهاد کریں جو سی ان سی ان یس ٹی م موڈل پر بنیاد ہے۔ ہمارے مدل میں، LSTM کو متن سے طویل مدت کی کنٹکسٹیل معلومات نکالنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. ہم اس معلومات کو انتخاب کرنے کے لئے توجه تکنیک استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ Name گہرے لہروں نے گہرے سی ان فوئٹر نقشه کو لے لیا ہے اور تیز سی کور کو پیش بینی کریں۔ ہمارا سیستم متوسط پیرسون کی تعلقات کا امتیاز 0.722 سے پہنچتا ہے (سطح 12/48) احساسات مضبوط تکلیف کے کام میں، اور 0.810 ویلنس ریگرس کے کام میں (سطح 15/38) ہے۔ یہ نشان دیتا ہے کہ ہماری سیسٹم اضافہ کر سکتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Anʼanaviy sentiment analyzeri, aslida ma'lum, ma'lum ma'lum matnlarning hissiyotlarini birlashtirishga foydalanadi. Lekin ular hissiyotning eng intensity maʼlumotini foydalana olmaydi. Шундай қилиб, SemEval-2018 Vazifa 1 mening ajoyib hissiyotning hissiyotlarini avtomatik aniqlash uchun foydalanadi. Bu vazifani boshqarish uchun biz CNN-LSTM modeli asosida tizimni tahlil qilamiz. In our model, LSTM is used to extract the long-term contextual information from texts.  Biz bu maʼlumotni tanlash uchun qo'llanmiz. Name Tovush qatlamlar qoʻyilgan CNN featurening kartasini olib tashlanadi va intensity qiymatni koʻrsatish. Bizning tizimmiz hissiyotni qayta boshqarish vazifasi 0.722 (12/48 dan foydalanadi) va 0.810 taqdimlik vazifasi (15/38dan foydalanadi). Bu tizimmizni koʻpaytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Các phương pháp phân tích cảm xúc truyền thống chủ yếu nhằm phân loại các quan điểm tình cảm hay các phân loại cảm xúc của văn bản. Tuy nhiên, họ không thể khai thác thông tin cường cảm. Vì vậy, nhiệm vụ SemEvol 1 được nhắm để tự động xác định độ mạnh của cảm xúc hay cảm xúc của tweet để khai thác thông tin cảm tình cảm thấu đáo của tôi. Để thực hiện nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống dựa trên một mô hình của CNN-HTTM. In our model, LSD được dùng để trích các thông tin ngữ pháp lâu dài từ các văn bản. Chúng tôi dùng kỹ thuật chú ý để lựa chọn thông tin này. Một lớp CNN với kích thước khác nhau của hạt nhân được dùng để lấy các tính năng cục bộ. Các lớp dày bao gồm các bản đồ có tính năng của CNN và dự đoán điểm độ mạnh. Hệ thống của chúng ta đạt tới điểm tương quan Pearson của 0.722 (thứ hạng 12/48) trong nhiệm vụ hồi phục độ rung cảm, và 0.810 trong nhiệm vụ hồi phục độ cao (phân loại 15/38). Nó cho thấy hệ thống của chúng ta có thể được mở rộng hơn.', 'bg': 'Традиционните подходи за анализ на сантимента се фокусират главно върху класифицирането на сантименталните полярности или емоционалните категории на текстовете. Те обаче не могат да използват информацията за интензивността на чувствата. Ето защо задача 1 има за цел автоматично да определи интензивността на емоциите или настроението на туитовете, за да добие фина сентиментална информация. За да се справим с тази задача, предлагаме система, базирана на модел на внимание. В нашия модел се използва за извличане на дългосрочна контекстуална информация от текстове. Ние прилагаме техники за внимание при избора на тази информация. За извличане на локални характеристики се използва слой с различен размер на ядрата. Плътните слоеве вземат обединените карти на характеристиките и предсказват резултатите от интензивността. Нашата система достига средна корелационна оценка на Пиърсън от 0,722 (класирана 12/48) в задачата за регресия на интензивността на емоциите и 0,810 в задачата за регресия на валентността (класирана 15/38). Това показва, че нашата система може да бъде допълнително разширена.', 'da': 'Traditionelle tilgange til følelsesanalyse fokuserer primært på klassificering af følelsespolariteter eller følelseskategorier af tekster. Men de kan ikke udnytte oplysningerne om følelsesintensitet. Derfor har SemEval-2018 Opgave 1 til formål automatisk at bestemme intensiteten af følelser eller følelser af tweets for at mine finkornede følelsesoplysninger. For at løse denne opgave foreslår vi et system baseret på en opmærksomhed CNN-LSTM model. I vores model bruges LSTM til at udtrække langsigtede kontekstuelle oplysninger fra tekster. Vi anvender opmærksomhedsteknikker til at vælge disse oplysninger. Et CNN lag med forskellig størrelse af kerner bruges til at udtrække lokale funktioner. De tætte lag tager de samlede CNN-funktionskort og forudsiger intensitetsscorerne. Vores system når gennemsnitlig Pearson korrelation score på 0,722 (rangeret 12/48) i følelsesintensitet regressionsopgave, og 0,810 i valens regressionsopgave (rangeret 15/38). Det indikerer, at vores system kan udvides yderligere.', 'nl': 'Traditionele sentimentanalyse benaderingen richten zich voornamelijk op het classificeren van sentimentpolariteiten of emotiecategorieën van teksten. Ze kunnen de informatie over sentimentintensiteit echter niet benutten. Daarom is de SemEval-2018 Task 1 bedoeld om automatisch de intensiteit van emoties of sentiment van tweets te bepalen om fijnkorrelige sentimentinformatie te mijnen. Om deze taak aan te pakken, stellen we een systeem voor gebaseerd op een aandacht CNN-LSTM model. In ons model wordt LSTM gebruikt om de lange termijn contextuele informatie uit teksten te halen. Bij het selecteren van deze informatie passen we aandachtstechnieken toe. Een CNN-laag met verschillende grootte kernels wordt gebruikt om lokale kenmerken te extraheren. De dichte lagen nemen de gepoolte CNN feature maps en voorspellen de intensiteitsscores. Ons systeem bereikt de gemiddelde Pearson correlatiescore van 0.722 (gerangschikt 12/48) in regressietaak van emotie intensiteit en 0.810 in regressietaak van valentie (gerangschikt 15/38). Het geeft aan dat ons systeem verder kan worden uitgebreid.', 'hr': 'Tradicionalna analiza osjećaja se uglavnom fokusira na klasifikaciju polaritija osjećaja ili kategorija teksta emocija. Međutim, ne mogu iskoristiti informacije o intenzitetu osjećaja. Stoga je zadatak 1 od semiEval-2018 usmjeren automatski određivati intenzitet emocija ili osjećaja tweets na informacije o mojim osjećajima. Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem na temelju pažnje CNN-LSTM model. U našem modelu, LSTM se koristi za izvlačenje dugoročnih contextualnih informacija iz teksta. Primjenjujemo pažnju tehnike za odabire te informacije. CNN sloj s različitim veličinom kernela se koristi za izvlačenje lokalnih karakteristika. Gusti slojevi uzimaju zajedničke mape CNN-a i predviđaju rezultate intenziteta. Naš sustav postiže prosječni korelacijski rezultat Pearsona od 0,722 (redovno 12/48) u zadatku regresije emocionalne intenzitete i 0,810 u zadatku valencijske regresije (redovno 15/38). To ukazuje da naš sustav može biti dalje proširen.', 'de': 'Traditionelle Ansätze der Stimmungsanalyse konzentrieren sich hauptsächlich auf die Klassifizierung der Stimmungspolaritäten oder Emotionskategorien von Texten. Allerdings können sie die Informationen zur Stimmungsintensität nicht nutzen. Daher zielt die SemEval-2018 Task 1 darauf ab, automatisch die Intensität von Emotionen oder Sentiment von Tweets zu bestimmen, um feinkörnige Sentiment-Informationen zu sammeln. Um dieser Aufgabe gerecht zu werden, schlagen wir ein System vor, das auf einem Aufmerksamkeitsmodell CNN-LSTM basiert. In unserem Modell wird LSTM verwendet, um die langfristigen Kontextinformationen aus Texten zu extrahieren. Bei der Auswahl dieser Informationen wenden wir Aufmerksamkeitstechniken an. Eine CNN-Schicht mit unterschiedlichen Kernelgrößen wird verwendet, um lokale Features zu extrahieren. Die dichten Schichten nehmen die gepoolten CNN Feature Maps und prognostizieren die Intensitätswerte. Unser System erreicht den durchschnittlichen Pearson-Korrelationswert von 0.722 (rangiert 12/48) in der Emotionsintensitätsregressionsaufgabe und 0.810 in der Valenzregressionsaufgabe (rangiert 15/38). Es zeigt an, dass unser System weiter ausgebaut werden kann.', 'id': 'Analisi sentimen tradisional mendekati terutama fokus pada klasifikasi polaritas sentimen atau kategori emosi teks. Namun, mereka tidak bisa mengeksploitasi informasi intensitas sentimen. Therefore, the SemEval-2018 Task 1 is aimed to automatically determine the intensity of emotions or sentiment of tweets to mine fine-grained sentiment information.  Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami mengusulkan sistem berdasarkan perhatian model CNN-LSTM. Dalam model kita, LSTM digunakan untuk mengekstrak informasi kontekstual jangka panjang dari teks. Kami menerapkan teknik perhatian untuk memilih informasi ini. Lapisan CNN dengan ukuran yang berbeda dari kernel digunakan untuk mengekstrak fitur lokal. Lapisan tebal mengambil peta karakteristik CNN dan memprediksi skor intensitas. Sistem kita mencapai nilai korelasi Pearson rata-rata 0,722 (ditangkap 12/48) dalam tugas regresi intensitas emosi, dan 0,810 dalam tugas regresi valensi (ditangkap 15/38). Ini menunjukkan bahwa sistem kita dapat diperluaskan lebih lanjut.', 'ko': '전통적인 감정 분석 방법은 주로 텍스트의 감정 극성이나 감정 유형을 분류하는 데 중심을 두었다.그러나 그들은 정서적 강도 정보를 이용할 수 없다.따라서 SemEval-18 미션1은 정서나 트윗 정서의 강도를 자동으로 정해 세분화된 정서 정보를 발굴하기 위한 것이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 주의력을 바탕으로 하는 CNN-LSTM 모델을 제시했다.우리 모델에서 LSTM은 텍스트에서 장기적인 언어 환경 정보를 추출하는 데 사용된다.우리는 주의력 기교를 운용하여 이런 정보를 선택한다.서로 다른 핵 크기의 CNN층을 이용하여 국부적인 특징을 추출하다.밀집층은 CNN 특징도를 얻어 강도 점수를 예측한다.우리 시스템이 정서 강도 회귀 임무에서 필슨 관련 평균 점수는 0.722(순위 12/48), 가격 회귀 임무에서 필슨 관련 평균 점수는 0.810(15/38)이다.이것은 우리 시스템이 한층 더 확장될 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa hisia za kiutamaduni unaingia kwa lengo la kutangaza hisia za uchaguzi au makundi ya hisia. Hata hivyo, hawawezi kutumia taarifa za hali ya juu. Kwa hiyo, kazi ya SemEval-2018 inakusudiwa kuamua kwa urahisi wa hisia au hisia za twiti kwa taarifa zangu zilizopata vizuri. Ili kuzungumzia kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo unaofanywa na muundo wa CNN-LSTM. Katika mifano yetu, LSTM inatumika kuondoa taarifa za muda mrefu za maandishi. Tunatumia mbinu za kuchagua taarifa hii. Viwango vya CNN yenye kiwango tofauti cha vifaa vinatumika kutengeneza vipengele vya ndani. Viwango vya chini huchukua ramani zenye utambulisho wa CNN na kutabiri vipimo vya juu. Our system reaches average Pearson correlation score of 0.722 (ranked 12/48) in emotion intensity regression task, and 0.810 in valence regression task (ranked 15/38).  Inaonyesha kwamba mfumo wetu unaweza kuongezeka zaidi.', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساسات سنتی به اصل تمرکز کردن قطعات احساسات یا قطعات احساسات متن به کلاس رسیده است. ولی آنها نمی توانند اطلاعات شدت احساسات را استفاده کنند. به همین دلیل، وظیفه ۱ نیمه سال ۲۰۰۸ هدف می\u200cگیرد که به طور خودکار فشار احساسات یا احساسات توئیت به اطلاعات احساسات پاکیزه من تعریف کند. برای حل این کار، ما یک سیستم را بر اساس یک مدل توجه CNN-LSTM پیشنهاد می کنیم. در مدل ما، LSTM برای extraction of the long term contextual information from texts استفاده می شود. ما تکنیک توجه را برای انتخاب این اطلاعات استفاده می کنیم. Name طبقه\u200cهای گسترده\u200cها نقشه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای CNN جمع شده را می\u200cگیرند و امتیاز شدت را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند. سیستم ما به مقدار متوسط ارتباط پیرسون 0.722 (درجه 12/48) در وظیفه افسردگی احساسات رسیده و 0.810 در وظیفه افسردگی (درجه 15/38). این نشان می دهد که سیستم ما می تواند بیشتر گسترش دهد.', 'af': "Tradisjoneel sentimentanalisie toekom hoofsaaklik fokus op die klassifisering van die sentiment polarisies of emosie kategories van tekste. Maar hulle kan nie die sentiment intensiteit inligting gebruik nie. Daarom, die SemEval-2018 taak 1 is die doel om outomaties die intensiteit van emosies of sentiment van tweets te bepaal na myne fyn-graad sentiment inligting. In order to address this task, we propose a system based on an attention CNN-LSTM model. In ons model word LSTM gebruik om die lang-term contextual inligting van teks uit te pak. Ons het aandagteknologies aangepas om hierdie inligting te kies. 'n CNN laag met verskillende grootte van kernels word gebruik om plaaslike funksies te uitpak. Die dense lagte neem die poolde CNN funksie kaarte en voorskou die intensiteit telling. Ons stelsel bereik gemiddelde Pearson korelasie telling van 0,722 (rangeer 12/48) in emosie intensiteit regresie taak, en 0,810 in valence regresie taak (rangeer 15/38). Dit wys dat ons stelsel verder uitbrei kan word.", 'am': 'የባሕላዊ ስሜት አስተያየት የጽሑፎችን አስተያየት እና የድምፅ ክፍሎች በመለፍ ላይ ትምህርት ይደረጋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የስሜት ጉዳይ መረጃ ሊጠቀም አይችሉም፡፡ ስለዚህም የሴmEval-2018 ስራ 1፣ የኢትዮጵያውያን ወይም የኢትዮጵያዊውን ስሜት ለኔ ጥሩ የስሜት መረጃ ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ስራ ለመግለጽ፣ የCNN-LSTM ሞዴል በመጠቀም የስርዓቱን ስርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሞዴል ውስጥ LSTM የረጅም ዘመን የሁለተኛውን መረጃ ከጽሑፍ ለመውጣት ይጠቀማል፡፡ ይህንን መረጃ ለመምረጥ ጥያቄዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ A CNN layer with different size of kernels is used to extract local features.  layers-action ሲስተምረታችን የፌርሶን ግንኙነት ቁጥር 0.722 (የተለየ 12/48) በአሳብ አካባቢ አድራሻ እና 0.810 በተለየ ትርፍ አድራሻ (15/38) ይደርሳል፡፡ ሲስተካከላችን ይጨመር ዘንድ ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': 'Däpli duýgular analizi hatlaryň polaritiýasyny ýa-da duýgular kategoriýasyny klasifikasynda fokus edýär. Ýöne olar duýgular kynçylyklyk maglumatyny ulanyp bilmeýärler. Şol sebäpli, SemEval-2018 Görevi 1-nji Görevi özünden duýgularyň ýa-da tweets duýgularynyň görnüşligini öz-özüne çykarmak maksady bolýar. Bu işi çözmek üçin CNN-LSTM nusgasyna daýan bir sistemi teklip ediyoruz. Biziň nusgymyzda, LSTM tekstlerden uzak durmuş maglumaty açmak üçin ullanýar Biz bu maglumaty saýlamak üçin üns tekniklerini uygulaýarys. CNN gatlaky farklı kerneler üçin ýerli özellikleri açmak üçin ullanýar Ýagtyk gatlaklar CNN özelliklerini götür we ýigşilik notlaryny çaklaýar. Biziň sistemamyz orta Pearson korelasyonyň 0.722 derejesini (derejesi 12/48) duýgularyň regressiýasynda we 0.810 derejesi regressiýasynda (derejesi 15/38). Bu sistemimiziň yzyndan uzaklaşdyrylmagy mümkin edýär.', 'sq': 'Analiza tradicionale e ndjenjave afrohet kryesisht në klasifikimin e polariteteve të ndjenjave apo kategorive emocionale të teksteve. Megjithatë, ata nuk mund t ë shfrytëzojnë informacionin e intensitetit të ndjenjave. Therefore, the SemEval-2018 Task 1 is aimed to automatically determine the intensity of emotions or sentiment of tweets to mine fine-grained sentiment information.  Për të trajtuar këtë detyrë, ne propozojmë një sistem bazuar në një model vëmendje CNN-LSTM. Në modelin tonë, LSTM përdoret për të nxjerrë informacionin kontekstual afat-gjatë nga tekstet. Ne aplikojmë teknika vëmendjeje për zgjedhjen e këtij informacioni. Një shtresë CNN me madhësi të ndryshme bërthamore përdoret për të nxjerrë karakteristikat lokale. Lajmet e dendura marrin hartat e përbashkëta të CNN dhe parashikojnë rezultatet e intensitetit. Sistemi ynë arrin rezultatin mesatar të korrelacionit të Pearsonit 0.722 (renditur 12/48) në detyrën e regresionit të intensitetit emocional dhe 0.810 në detyrën e regresionit të valencës (renditur 15/38). Kjo tregon se sistemi ynë mund të zgjerohet më tej.', 'az': 'Tradicionali hisslər analizi hisslərin polariti ya da hisslərin mətnlərin kategoriyalarını təsdiqləməyə çox odaqlanmasına yaxınlaşır. Lakin onlar hisslərin şiddətli məlumatını istifadə edə bilməzlər. Buna görə də, SemEval-2018 Task 1 öz-özündən duyguların şiddətini və ya tweets duygularının mənim hisslərinim məlumatına təşkil etmək məqsədilə məşğul edildi. Bu işi çəkmək üçün CNN-LSTM modeli üzərində sistemi təklif edirik. Bizim modelimizdə, LSTM uzun müddət müxtəlif məlumatları textlərdən çıxartmaq üçün istifadə edilir. Biz bu məlumatları seçmək üçün gözləmə tekniklərini istifadə edirik. Yerli xüsusiyyətləri çıxartmaq üçün CNN səviyyəsi müxtəlif fərqli fərqli çubuqları ilə istifadə edilir. Yuxunc səviyyələr birləşdirilmiş CNN xüsusiyyətlərini alır və şiddətli nöqtələrini təmin edirlər. Sistemimiz ortalama Pearson korrelasyon nöqtəsinə 0,722 (dərəcə 12/48) duygusal şiddətli regresyon işin ə çatdı və 0,810 (dərəcə 15/38) değerli regresyon işinə çatdı. Bu sistemimizin daha çox genişlənməsini göstərir.', 'hy': 'Հավանդական զգացմունքների վերլուծության մոտեցումները հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են զգացմունքների կողմնականության կամ զգացմունքների տեքստների կատեգորիաների դասավորման վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք չեն կարող օգտագործել զգացմունքների ինտենսիվությունը: Այսպիսով, ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի առաջին հանձնարարությունը նպատակն է ինքնաբերաբար որոշել զգացմունքների կամ թվիթերի զգացմունքների ինտենսիվությունը, որպեսզի հանդիսանան իմ գեղեցիկ զգացմունքների ինֆորմացիան: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք համակարգ, որը հիմնված է CNN-LSMT մոդելի վրա: Մեր մոդելի մեջ LSMT-ն օգտագործվում է երկարաժամկետ կոնտեքստոնալ տեղեկատվությունը տեքստներից հանելու համար: We apply attention techniques to selecting this information.  Մի CNN շերտ, որն ունի տարբեր չափսեր, օգտագործվում է տեղական հատկություններ հանելու համար: Հուժեղ շերտերը վերցնում են միավորված CNN հատկանիշների քարտեզները և կանխատեսում ինտենսիվության գնահատականները: Մեր համակարգը հասնում է Պիրսոնի միջին կորելացիայի գնահատականին 0.722 (դասակարգված 12-48) զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության ռեգրեսիայի խնդրում և 0.810-ին վալենսի ռեգրեսիայի խնդրում (դասակարգված 15-38): It indicates that our system can be further extended.', 'bn': 'ঐতিহ্যবাহী অনুভূতির বিশ্লেষণ মূলত মনোযোগ প্রদানের প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করে লেখার বিভিন্ন অনুভূতি বা অনুভূতির বিভাগের ব তবে তারা এই আবেগের গভীর তথ্য ব্যবহার করতে পারে না। তাই সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে টুইটের অনুভূতি বা অনুভূতি নির্ধারণ করার জন্য। এই কাজের কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি সিএনএন-এলসিএম মডেলের উপর ভিত্তিক একটি সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করি। আমাদের মডেলে LSTM লেখা থেকে দীর্ঘমেয়াদের বিভিন্ন তথ্য বের করার জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। এই তথ্য নির্বাচনের জন্য আমরা মনোযোগ প্রয়োগ করি। Name গভীর পরিস্থিতি সিএনএন বৈশিষ্ট্যাপের মানচিত্র নিয়ে যায় এবং গভীর স্কোর ভবিষ্যৎ করে। আমাদের সিস্টেম গড়ে পেয়ার্সনের সংযোগ স্কোর পৌঁছে যায় 0. 722 (১২/৪৮ ভাগ) অনুভূতির গড়ে পুনরুদ্ধার কর্মসূচীতে এবং ০. 810 ভ্যালেন্স পুনঃদমনের এটা নির্দেশ করে যে আমাদের সিস্টেম আরো বৃদ্ধি হতে পারে।', 'bs': 'Tradicionalna analiza osjećaja se uglavnom fokusira na klasifikaciju polaritija osjećaja ili kategorija teksta emocija. Međutim, ne mogu iskoristiti informacije o intenzitetu sentimenta. Stoga, zadatak 1 od semiEval-2018 je usmjeren automatski određivati intenzitet emocija ili osjećaja tweeta na informacije o mojim osjećajima. Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem na osnovu pažnje CNN-LSTM model. U našem modelu, LSTM se koristi za izvlačenje dugoročnih contextualnih informacija iz teksta. Primjenjujemo pažnju tehnike da izaberemo ove informacije. CNN sloj sa različitim veličinom kernela se koristi za izvlačenje lokalnih karakteristika. Gusti slojevi uzimaju zajedničke mape CNN-a i predviđaju rezultate intenziteta. Naš sistem postiže prosječni korelacijski rezultat Pearsona od 0,722 (ranked 12/48) u zadatku regresije emocionalne intenzitete, i 0,810 u zadatku valencijske regresije (ranked 15/38). To ukazuje da naš sistem može biti produžen dalje.', 'et': 'Traditsioonilised sentimentaalse analüüsi lähenemisviisid keskenduvad peamiselt sentimentaalsete polariteetide või emotsioonikategooriate klassifitseerimisele tekstides. Siiski ei saa nad ära kasutada sentimentaalse intensiivsuse infot. Seetõttu on SemEval-2018 ülesande 1 eesmärk automaatselt määrata kindlaks säutsude emotsioonide või sentimentaalsuse intensiivsus, et kaevandada peeneteralist sentimentaalset teavet. Selle ülesande täitmiseks pakume välja süsteemi, mis põhineb tähelepanu CNN-LSTM mudelil. Meie mudelis kasutatakse LSTM-i pikaajalise kontekstiteabe ekstraheerimiseks tekstidest. Me rakendame tähelepanu meetodeid selle teabe valimisel. Kohalike omaduste ekstraheerimiseks kasutatakse erineva suurusega tuumade CNN kihti. Tihedad kihid võtavad ühendatud CNN funktsioonide kaardid ja ennustavad intensiivsusskoorid. Meie süsteem saavutab emotsioonide intensiivsuse regressiooni ülesandes keskmise Pearsoni korrelatsiooni skoori 0,722 (12/48) ja valentse regressiooni ülesandes 0,810 (15/38). See näitab, et meie süsteemi saab veelgi laiendada.', 'ca': "Els enfocaments tradicionals d'anàlisi del sentiment es centren principalment en classificar les polaritats del sentiment o les categories emocionals de textos. No obstant això, no poden aprofitar la informació sobre la intensitat del sentiment. Per tant, la tasca 1 de SemEval-2018 està destinada a determinar automàticament la intensitat de les emocions o el sentiment de tweets per a minar la informació de sentiments fins. Per abordar aquesta tasca, proposem un sistema basat en un model d'atenció CNN-LSTM. En el nostre model, LSTM s'utilitza per extrair la informació contextual a llarg termini dels textos. Aplicam tècniques d'atenció a la selecció d'aquesta informació. Una capa CNN amb diferents tamanys de núcles s'utilitza per extraure característiques locals. Les capes denses agafen els mapes agrupats de característiques CNN i predien les puntuacions d'intensitat. Our system reaches average Pearson correlation score of 0.722 (ranked 12/48) in emotion intensity regression task, and 0.810 in valence regression task (ranked 15/38).  Indica que el nostre sistema es pot estendre més.", 'cs': 'Tradiční přístupy analýzy sentimentů se zaměřují především na klasifikaci sentimentových polarit nebo emočních kategorií textů. Nicméně nemohou využít informace o intenzitě sentimentu. Proto je SemEval-2018 Task 1 zaměřen na automatické určení intenzity emocí nebo sentimentu tweetů, aby mohl doložit jemně zrnité sentimentové informace. Pro řešení tohoto úkolu navrhujeme systém založený na pozornostním CNN-LSTM modelu. V našem modelu slouží LSTM k extrakci dlouhodobých kontextových informací z textů. Při výběru těchto informací uplatňujeme techniky pozornosti. K extrakci lokálních funkcí se používá vrstva CNN s různou velikostí jader. Husté vrstvy používají sdružené CNN funkční mapy a předpovídají skóre intenzity. Náš systém dosahuje průměrného Pearsonova korelačního skóre 0,722 (hodnocené 12/48) v regresním úkolu intenzity emocí a 0,810 v valenčním regresním úkolu (hodnocení 15/38). To znamená, že náš systém může být dále rozšířen.', 'fi': 'Perinteiset tunteiden analyysimenetelmät keskittyvät pääasiassa tunteiden polariteettien tai tunteiden luokitteluun tekstissä. He eivät kuitenkaan voi hyödyntää tunteiden intensiteettitietoja. Siksi SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1 pyrkii automaattisesti määrittämään tunteiden tai twiittien tunteiden voimakkuuden ja kaivamaan hienojakoisia tunteita koskevia tietoja. Tämän tehtävän hoitamiseksi ehdotamme CNN-LSTM-malliin perustuvaa järjestelmää. Mallissamme LSTM:ää käytetään pitkän aikavälin kontekstitietojen poimimiseen teksteistä. Käytämme tarkkoja tekniikoita näiden tietojen valinnassa. Paikallisten ominaisuuksien erottamiseen käytetään CNN-kerrosta, jossa on erikokoisia ytimiä. Tiheät kerrokset ottavat yhdistetyt CNN-ominaisuuskartat ja ennustavat intensiteettipisteet. Järjestelmämme saavuttaa Pearsonin keskimääräisen korrelaatiopisteen 0,722 (sijoitus 12/48) tunteiden intensiteetin regressiotehtävässä ja 0,810 (sijoitus 15/38). Se osoittaa, että järjestelmäämme voidaan laajentaa entisestään.', 'jv': 'Name Nanging, wong-wong kuwi ora bisa mlebu nggawe informasi kapan-kapan ning kelas. Sampeyan, Samsul semebal-2013 task 1 dadi nggawe Perintah mengko awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe kesempatan karo iCalendar punika tuat kanggo ngerasai informasi sing apik dhéwé. Ngawe ngerti nggawe task iki, kita supoyo sistem sing bisa supoyo sistem dadi nang modèl MT-LTT. text-box-mode Awak dhéwé nggawe teknik atensi kanggo nambah informasi iki. Una rang string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Sistem dhéwé kuwi nggawe soko nggawe Perintah-terateraksi sing 0.242 (rangsane 12/482) ing nggawe Regresyon seneng pisan soko iCalendar, lan 0. Mungkin ngomong, sistem punika isa luwih-luwih apik.', 'he': 'ניתוח רגשות מסורתי מתמקד בעיקר בכיתוי הקולריטיות של הרגשות או הקטגוריות רגשות של טקסטים. עם זאת, הם לא יכולים לנצל את מידע האינטנסיביות של הרגשות. לכן, משימה 1 SemEval-2018 מתכוונת לקבוע באופן אוטומטי את האינטנסיבציה של רגשות או רגשות של טוויטים למידע רגשות מעולה שלי. כדי להתמודד עם המשימה הזאת, אנחנו מציעים מערכת מבוססת על תשומת לב מודל CNN-LSTM. במודל שלנו, LSTM משתמש כדי להוציא את המידע הקונקסטוקלי לטווח ארוך מהטקסטים. אנחנו משתמשים בטכניקות תשומת לב לבחירה של המידע הזה. שיטה CNN עם גודל שונה של גרעינים משתמשת כדי לחלץ תכונות מקומיות. השכבות העצומות לוקחות את המפות המאוחדות של CNN ולחזות את נקודות האינטנסיביות. המערכת שלנו מגיעה למוצע התשובה של פירסון של 0.722 (מדרגה 12/48) במשימה של חזרה אינטנסיביות רגשית, ו-0.810 במשימה של חזרה ואלנסיה (מדרגה 15/38). זה מצביע על כך שהמערכת שלנו יכולה להאריך יותר.', 'ha': "Ana yi wa'anar ɗabi'a, yana zuwa mafiya ƙayyadadde zuwa a rarraba fassarar takardar hisia ko kuma categories of matsayin. A lokacin da ba su iya amfani da ma'abũcin sanyi ba. Saboda haka, aikin SemEl-2018 aka aim wa ana ƙayyade farat ɗaya game da hisoyi ko hisoyi na Twitter zuwa zan faɗin bayani na fikanci. Dõmin in yi tambaya ga wannan aikin, sai mu buɗa wata na'ura, a kan wani misali na CNN-LSM. In our model, LSTM is used to extract the long-term contextual information from texts.  Tuna amfani da zane-zane kan zaɓi wannan information. An yi amfani da zane wani asalin CNN da girmar kernel mai daban-daban, don a nuna wasu fanati na lokacin. Layerlin duhu na ɗauki karwatunan fanatin CNN da aka poore shi kuma ya yi ƙyacewa ga score masu ƙarfi. TsarinMu ya kai ga nau'i na Pearson mai kamfata nau'i na 0.422 (ranked 12/48) a cikin aikin damu na kashi na hisani, da 0.810 a cikin aikin damƙar regression (ranked 15/38). Yana nũna cewa za'a iya ƙara ƙara tsarinmu.", 'sk': 'Tradicionalni pristopi analize sentimenta se osredotočajo predvsem na klasifikacijo sentimentalnih polarnosti ali čustvenih kategorij besedil. Vendar pa ne morejo izkoristiti informacij o intenzivnosti čustva. Zato je namen naloge 1 SemEval-2018 samodejno določiti intenzivnost čustev ali čustva tweetov, da bi izkoristili drobnozrnate podatke o čustvih. Za reševanje te naloge predlagamo sistem, ki temelji na modelu pozornosti CNN-LSTM. V našem modelu LSTM uporabljamo za pridobivanje dolgoročnih kontekstnih informacij iz besedil. Pri izbiri teh informacij uporabljamo tehnike pozornosti. Plast CNN z različno velikostjo jedrc se uporablja za ekstrakcijo lokalnih značilnosti. Goste plasti vzamejo združene zemljevide funkcij CNN in napovedujejo ocene intenzivnosti. Naš sistem doseže povprečno Pearsonovo korelacijsko oceno 0,722 (12/48) v nalogi regresije intenzivnosti čustev in 0,810 v nalogi regresije valence (15/38). To kaže, da je naš sistem mogoče nadalje razširiti.', 'bo': 'Traditional sentiment analysis approaches mainly focus on classifying the sentiment polarities or emotion categories of texts. ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སེམས་ཚོར་བཅས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ། དེར་བརྟེན། SemEval བྱ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་LSTM་ཡི་གེའི་བརྒྱུད་རིམ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་ཙམ་ཕྱིར་ཐུབ་པ ང་ཚོས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱད་ནས་བློ་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། kernels་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་མ་འདྲ་བའི་CNN བང་རིས་སྤྱད་ནས་རང་ཁུལ་ཆོག་འཆར་འདོན་བྱེད་པ The dense layers take the pooled CNN feature maps and predict the intensity scores. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ནང་དུ་བརྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐོང་ཚད་0.722 མཐོང་ཚད་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། དེས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་མཚོན་གྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'EiTAKA at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'ar': 'EiTAKA في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: مجموعة من N-Channels ConvNet و XGboost Regressors لتحليل المشاعر للتغريدات', 'pt': 'EiTAKA no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Um conjunto de N-Channels ConvNet e XGboost Regressors para análise de emoções de tweets', 'es': 'EiTaka en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Un conjunto de regresores de ConvNet y XGBoost de N-Channels para el análisis emocional de los tuits', 'fr': "Eitaka au SemEval-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: un ensemble de régresseurs ConvNet et XGBoost à N canaux N pour l'analyse des émotions des tweets", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のEiTAKAタスク1 ：ツイートの感情分析のためのNチャンネルConvNetとXGboostリジェクターのアンサンブル', 'zh': 'EiTAKA在SemEval-2018务1:N道ConvNet与XGboost回归器合,以推文情析', 'ru': 'EiTAKA на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Ансамбль N-каналов ConvNet и XGboost регрессоров для эмоционального анализа твитов', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर EiTAKA: Tweets के भावना विश्लेषण के लिए N-Channels ConvNet और XGboost Regressors का एक पहनावा', 'ga': 'EiTAKA ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Ensemble de N-Cainéil ConvNet agus XGboost Aischéimnitheoirí le haghaidh Anailís Mothúcháin ar Tweetanna', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'EiTAKA a SemEval-2018 feladat 1: N-channeles ConvNet és XGboost regressorok együttese a tweetek érzelmi elemzéséhez', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Ένα σύνολο των Ν-καναλιών ConvNet και XGboost Recressors για την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων των tweets', 'it': "EiTAKA a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Un insieme di N-Channels ConvNet e XGboost regressori per l'analisi emotiva dei tweet", 'kk': 'EiTAKA 1- жарты- 2018 тапсырмасында: N- арналдардың ConvNet және XGboost регрессорларының көңіл сипаттамасын талдау үшін', 'lt': 'EiTAKA at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'mk': 'EiTAKA на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'ms': 'EiTAKA at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1: എ- ചാനല്\u200dസ് കോണ്\u200dവ്നെറ്റിലും എക്സ്ബൂസ്റ്റ് റെഗ്രെക്സ്റ്റര്\u200dമെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'EiTAKA at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'pl': 'EiTAKA na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Zespół N-kanałów ConvNet i XGboost Regressorów do analizy emocji tweetów', 'mt': 'EiTAKA f’SemEval-2018 Task 1: Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'ro': 'EiTAKA la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Un ansamblu de regretoare ConvNet și XGboost N-Channels pentru analiza emoțională a tweeturilor', 'sr': 'EiTAKA na pola Evala-2018 Task 1: Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'si': 'EiTAKA at semeval-2018 Job 1: an Ensemble of N-Channells ConvNet and XGboost regressers for Emotion Research of Tweets', 'so': 'EiTAKA at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'no': 'EiTAKA ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Eit omslag av N-kanalar ConvNet og XGboost regressorer for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'sv': 'EiTAKA på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: En samling N-Channels ConvNet och XGboost Regressorer för känsloanalys av tweets', 'ur': 'اِٹاکا اِٹاکا اِس مِوئل-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں: N-Channels ConvNet اور XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Comment=Giao dịch Comment=Giao thông Comment=Giao thông Comment=Giao thông Comment=Giao thông Comment=KDBBA) Name', 'hr': 'EiTAKA na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 1: Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'nl': 'EiTAKA op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Een Ensemble van N-Channels ConvNet en XGboost Regressors voor Emotieanalyse van Tweets', 'de': 'EiTAKA bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Ein Ensemble von N-Channels ConvNet und XGboost Regressoren zur Emotionsanalyse von Tweets', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Ансамбъл от N-канални регресори за анализ на емоциите на туитове', 'da': 'EiTAKA på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Et ensemble af N-Channels ConvNet og XGboost Regressorer til følelsesanalyse af tweets', 'fa': 'EiTAKA در پایین Eval-2018 Task 1: Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'sw': 'EiTAKA katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Utafiti wa chama cha N-Channel ConvNet na Washindi wa XGboost', 'tr': 'EiTAKA at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'id': 'EiTAKA di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Ensemble dari N-Channels ConvNet dan XGboost Regressors untuk Analisi Emosi Tweets', 'ko': 'EiTAKA가SemEval-18 작업1: 트위터 정서 분석에 사용되는 N채널 ConvNet과 XGboost 회귀기의 집합', 'af': "EiTAKA by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: ' n Ensemble van N-kanale ConvNet en XGboost Regressors vir Emotion Analysis van Tweets", 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১-এ ঈতাকা: টুইটারের ইমোটিয়ন বিশ্লেষণের জন্য এক্সেমেবল এন-চ্যানেল কনভেন্ট এবং এক্সজিবুস্ট নিয়ন্ত্রণের নিয়ন্ত্রণে', 'sq': 'EiTAKA në SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'am': 'ስራ 1: የN-Channels ConvNet እና XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'bs': 'EiTAKA na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'ca': 'EiTAKA a SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'az': 'EiTAKA at SemEval-2018 Task 1: A Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'et': 'EiTAKA SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: N-kanalite ConvNet ja XGboost regressorite ansambel tweetide emotsionaalüüsiks', 'cs': 'EiTAKA na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Soubor N-kanálů ConvNet a XGboost Regressorů pro emoční analýzu tweetů', 'fi': 'EiTAKA SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: N-Channels ConvNet- ja XGboost Regressorien Ensemble for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'jv': '8 TaKA at semi-2008 task 1: an ENsemble of N-channels conVnet and XGBOst Regresor for EMOton Test of Two', 'ha': 'EiTAKA at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'he': 'EiTAKA ב SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets', 'sk': 'EiTAKA na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Ansambel N-kanalov ConvNet in XGboost Regressorjev za analizo čustev tweetov', 'bo': 'EiTAKA at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble of N-Channels ConvNet and XGboost Regressors for Emotion Analysis of Tweets'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system that has been used in Task1 Affect in Tweets. We combine two different approaches. The first one called N-Stream ConvNets, which is a deep learning approach where the second one is XGboost regressor based on a set of embedding and lexicons based features. Our system was evaluated on the testing sets of the tasks outperforming all other approaches for the Arabic version of valence intensity regression task and valence ordinal classification task.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا الذي تم استخدامه في Task1 Affect في التغريدات. نحن نجمع بين نهجين مختلفين. الأول يسمى N-Stream ConvNets ، وهو نهج تعليمي عميق حيث يكون الثاني هو XGboost Regressor استنادًا إلى مجموعة من ميزات التضمين والقواميس. تم تقييم نظامنا بناءً على مجموعات اختبار المهام التي تفوقت على جميع الأساليب الأخرى للنسخة العربية من مهمة انحدار كثافة التكافؤ ومهمة التصنيف الترتيبي للتكافؤ.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema que foi usado na Tarefa 1 Afetar Tweets. Combinamos duas abordagens diferentes. O primeiro chamado N-Stream ConvNets, que é uma abordagem de aprendizado profundo, onde o segundo é o regressor XGboost baseado em um conjunto de recursos baseados em incorporação e léxicos. Nosso sistema foi avaliado nos conjuntos de testes das tarefas superando todas as outras abordagens para a versão árabe da tarefa de regressão de intensidade de valência e tarefa de classificação ordinal de valência.', 'fr': "Ce document décrit notre système qui a été utilisé dans Task1 Affect in Tweets. Nous combinons deux approches différentes. Le premier s'appelle N-Stream ConvNets, qui est une approche d'apprentissage profond où le second est un régresseur XGBoost basé sur un ensemble de fonctionnalités basées sur l'intégration et les lexiques. Notre système a été évalué sur les ensembles de tests des tâches surpassant toutes les autres approches pour la version arabe de la tâche de régression de l'intensité de valence et de la tâche de classification ordinale de valence.", 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro sistema que se ha utilizado en la Tarea 1 Affect in Tweets. Combinamos dos enfoques diferentes. El primero se llama N-Sstream ConvNets, que es un enfoque de aprendizaje profundo donde el segundo es el regresor XGBoost basado en un conjunto de características de incrustación y basadas en lexicones. Nuestro sistema se evaluó en los conjuntos de pruebas de las tareas que superaron a todos los demás enfoques para la versión árabe de la tarea de regresión de intensidad de valencia y la tarea de clasificación ordinal de valencia.', 'ja': '本稿では、Task 1 Affect in Tweetsで使用されているシステムについて説明します。私たちは2つの異なるアプローチを組み合わせています。1つ目はN - Stream ConvNetsと呼ばれます。これはディープラーニングのアプローチです。2つ目はXGboostリグレッサーです。これは、埋め込みと辞書ベースの機能のセットに基づいています。我々のシステムは、アラビア語版の原子価強度回帰タスクと原子価順序分類タスクのための他のすべてのアプローチを上回るタスクのテストセットで評価された。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система, которая была использована в Task1 Affect в твитах. Мы объединяем два разных подхода. Первый называется N-Stream ConvNets, что является подходом глубокого обучения, где второй является XGboost регрессором, основанным на наборе вложений и лексиконов. Наша система была оценена на тестовых наборах задач, превосходящих все другие подходы для арабской версии задачи регрессии интенсивности валентности и задачи ординарной классификации валентности.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हमारे सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जिसका उपयोग ट्वीट्स में Task1 प्रभाव में किया गया है। हम दो अलग-अलग दृष्टिकोणों को जोड़ते हैं। पहला एक एन-स्ट्रीम ConvNets कहा जाता है, जो एक गहरी सीखने का दृष्टिकोण है जहां दूसरा एक एम्बेडिंग और शब्दकोश आधारित सुविधाओं के एक सेट के आधार पर XGboost regressor है। हमारे सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन वैलेंस तीव्रता प्रतिगमन कार्य और वैलेंस ऑर्डिनल वर्गीकरण कार्य के अरबी संस्करण के लिए अन्य सभी दृष्टिकोणों को पछाड़ने वाले कार्यों के परीक्षण सेट पर किया गया था।', 'zh': '本文言 Task1 Influence in Tweets 中所用之统。 合二术。 一曰N-Stream ConvNets,一曰深学,二曰基于词典XGboost回归器。 吾等统于任者集上为评估,此集优阿拉伯语版本之价强归务,与价序数分类者,凡诸他法。', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras a úsáideadh in Task1 Affect in Tweets. Cuirimid dhá chur chuige éagsúla le chéile. An chéad cheann ar a dtugtar N-Stream ConvNets, a bhfuil cur chuige foghlama domhain ina bhfuil an dara ceann regressor XGboost bunaithe ar shraith de leabú agus lexicons gnéithe atá bunaithe. Rinneadh measúnú ar ár gcóras ar thacair thástálacha na dtascanna a sháraigh gach cur chuige eile don leagan Araibis de thasc aischéimniúcháin déine valence agus tasc aicmithe ordáin valence.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი სისტემა, რომელიც საქაღალდე 1- ში გამოყენებულია Tweets- ში. ჩვენ ორი განსხვავებული დახმარებას შემყვებით. პირველი, რომელიც N-Stream ConvNets- იან, რომელიც ძალიან სწავლების მიღება, რომელიც მეორე არის XGboost რეგრესორი, რომელიც დაყენება და ლექსიკონს ბაზეული ფუნქციების ნაწილი. ჩვენი სისტემა იყო განსაზღვრებულია, რომელიც დავაკეთებულია ყველა სხვა პროგრამის გავალენსი ინტენსტივის რეგრესიის დავაკეთება და გავალენსი ორგანლიული კლასიფიკაციის დავაკეთება.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας που έχει χρησιμοποιηθεί στην Επίδραση Task1 στα Tweets. Συνδυάζουμε δύο διαφορετικές προσεγγίσεις. Η πρώτη ονομάζεται η οποία είναι μια προσέγγιση βαθιάς μάθησης όπου η δεύτερη είναι η αναδρομή βασισμένη σε ένα σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών ενσωμάτωσης και λεξικών. Το σύστημά μας αξιολογήθηκε με βάση τα σύνολα δοκιμών των εργασιών που ξεπερνούν όλες τις άλλες προσεγγίσεις για την αραβική έκδοση της εργασίας παλινδρόμησης έντασης και της εργασίας ταξινομήσεως κανονικής έντασης valence.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány ismerteti a rendszerünket, amelyet a feladat1 érintett Tweetekben használtak. Két különböző megközelítést ötvözünk. Az első az N-Stream ConvNets nevű, amely egy mélytanulási megközelítés, ahol a második az XGboost regressor egy sor beágyazási és lexikon alapú funkció. Rendszerünket a valencia intenzitás regressziós feladat és valencia rendes osztályozási feladat arab verziójában minden más megközelítést felülmúló feladatok tesztelési sorozata alapján értékeltük.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema utilizzato in Task1 Affect in Tweets. Combiniamo due approcci diversi. Il primo chiamato N-Stream ConvNets, che è un approccio di deep learning dove il secondo è regressore XGboost basato su un insieme di funzionalità basate su embedding e lessici. Il nostro sistema è stato valutato sui set di test dei compiti che superano tutti gli altri approcci per la versione araba del compito di regressione dell'intensità di valenza e compito di classificazione ordinaria di valenza.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama mūsų sistema, kuri buvo naudojama 1 užduotyje „Poveikis Tweetuose“. Mes deriname du skirtingus metodus. Pirmasis vadinamas N-Stream ConvNets, kuris yra gilaus mokymosi metodas, kai antrasis yra XGboost regressorius, grindžiamas įdėjimo ir leksikonų savybėmis. Mūsų sistema buvo įvertinta atliekant bandymus su užduotimis, viršijančiomis visus kitus metodus, taikomus arabiškai atliekant valencijos intensyvumo regresijos užduotį ir valencijos ordinarinę klasifikaciją.', 'mk': 'Оваа вест го опишува нашиот систем кој е употребен во Task1 Affect на Твитови. Комбинираме два различни пристапи. Првиот се вика N-Stream ConvNets, кој е пристап на длабоко учење каде вториот е XGboost регресор базиран на сет на вградени и лексикони основани карактеристики. Нашиот систем беше проценет на тестирачките групи задачи кои ги надминуваат сите други пристапи за арапската верзија на задачата за регресија на интензитетот на валенцијата и задачата за ординална класификација на валенцијата.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 1- тапсырманың Твиттерде қолданылған жүйеңізді таңдайды. Біз екі әртүрлі жағдайды біріктіреміз. Біріншісі N- Stream ConvNets деген, екіншісі XGboost регрессоры ендіру және лексикондың негіздеген мүмкіндіктерінің жиынына негізделген түрлі оқыту арқылы. Біздің жүйеміз тапсырмаларды тексеру баптауларына бағалады. Барлық әдістер араб нұсқасының көлемі регрессия тапсырмасын және көлемі орындалық классификациялық тапсырмасының араб', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna li ntużat f’Task1 Affett in Tweets. Nikkombinaw żewġ approċċi differenti. L-ewwel waħda msejħa N-Stream ConvNets, li hija approċċ ta’ tagħlim profond fejn it-tieni waħda hija r-regressur XGboost ibbażat fuq sett ta’ karatteristiċi bbażati fuq l-inkorporazzjoni u l-lexicons. Our system was evaluated on the testing sets of the tasks outperforming all other approaches for the Arabic version of valence intensity regression task and valence ordinal classification task.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний Твиттийн Task1 Effect-д хэрэглэгдсэн системийг тайлбарладаг. Бид хоёр өөр арга зам нийлүүлнэ. N-Stream ConvNets гэдэг анхны нэг нь гүн гүнзгий суралцах арга юм. Хоёр дахь нь XGboost репрессор юм. Бидний систем даалгаварын туршилтын даалгавар нь араб хэлбэрээс илүү олон арга барилгыг дамжуулж буй даалгаваруудыг шалгаж үзүүлсэн.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita yang telah digunakan dalam Task1 Affect dalam Tweets. Kita menggabungkan dua pendekatan yang berbeza. Yang pertama dipanggil N-Stream ConvNets, yang merupakan pendekatan pembelajaran dalam di mana yang kedua adalah regresor XGboost berdasarkan set ciri-ciri yang berdasarkan penyembedding dan leksikon. Sistem kami telah diuji pada set ujian tugas yang melampaui semua pendekatan lain untuk versi Arab tugas regresi intensiti valensi dan tugas klasifikasi ordinal valensi.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system, który został użyty w Task1 Affect w Tweetach. Łączymy dwa różne podejścia. Pierwszy o nazwie N-Stream ConvNets, który jest podejściem głębokiego uczenia, gdzie drugi jest regressor XGboost oparty na zestawie funkcji osadzania i leksykonów. Nasz system został oceniony na zestawach testowych zadań przewyższających wszystkie inne podejścia dla arabskiej wersji zadania regresji walencji intensywności i zadania klasyfikacji walencji ordynalnej.', 'ml': 'ടെസ്ക്1 ഫെക്റ്റില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെപ്പറ്റി ഈ പത്രം വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്ത വഴികളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. The first one called N-Stream ConvNets, which is a deep learning approach where the second one is XGboost regressor based on a set of embedding and lexicons based features.  നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടുകൊണ്ടിരുന്നു. മറ്റൊരു വഴികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് അറ', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru care a fost utilizat în Task1 Affect în Tweets. Combinăm două abordări diferite. Primul numit N-Stream ConvNets, care este o abordare de învățare profundă în cazul în care al doilea este regresor XGboost bazat pe un set de caracteristici bazate pe încorporare și lexicoane. Sistemul nostru a fost evaluat pe seturile de testare ale sarcinilor depășind toate celelalte abordări pentru versiunea arabă a sarcinii de regresie a intensității valenței și sarcinii de clasificare ordinară a valenței.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem koji je korišten u posledici Task1 u Tweets-u. Kombiniramo dva različita pristupa. Prvi koji se zove N-Stream ConvNets, koji je duboki pristup učenja gde je drugi XGboost regressor zasnovan na setu ugrađenih i leksionskih karakteristika. Naš sistem je procijenjen na testiranjima setima zadataka koji su iznosili sve ostale pristupe arapske verzije funkcije regresije valencijske intenzitete i odgovorne odgovorne klasifikacije.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt som er brukt i oppgåve1- effekt i Tweets. Vi kombinerer to ulike tilnærmingar. Den første kalla N-Stream ConvNets, som er ein dyp læringstilnærming der den andre er XGboost regressor basert på eit sett av innbyggingsog leksikonsbaserte funksjonar. Systemet vårt er evaluert på testsettet av oppgåver som utfører alle andre tilnærmingar for den arabiske versjonen av valensitetensregresjonsverkt og kvantis ordinale klassifikasjonsverkt.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා කාර්ය 1 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ට්විට් වලින් භාවිත කරලා තියෙනවා. අපි වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවේශනය දෙකක් එකතු කරනවා. N-Stream ConvNets කියලා පළමුවෙනි කෙනෙක්, ඒක තමයි ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තමයි දෙවෙනි කෙනෙක් XGboost regressor සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ සහ අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ අනිත් අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩේ අරාබික විස්තරයේ', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் பணி1 தாக்கத்தில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட எங்கள் அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. நாம் இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான வழிகளை இணைக்கிறோம். முதல் ஒன்று N- தெரும் கான்வெட்ஸ் என்று அழைக்கப்பட்டது, அது ஒரு ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறையாகும். இரண்டாவது எக்ஸ்ஜிபுஸ்ட் மற்றும் லெக்சிக எங்கள் கணினியின் சோதனையின் அமைப்புகளில் மதிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்ற அனைத்து வழிகளையும் செய்து அனுப்பினால் அரபி வெளியீட்டிற்கான முற', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu sawiraa nidaamka ee lagu isticmaalay Task1 Affect ee Tweets. Waxaynu isku xiraynaa laba qaab oo kala duwan. Kii ugu horreeya ee la yidhaahdo N-Stream ConvNets, kaas oo ah qaab aad u dheer waxbarasho, meesha labaad uu yahay XGboost regressor oo ku saleysan koox xeeral oo ku saleysan qalabka iyo leksikanka. Sirkanaga waxaa lagu qiimeeyay kooxaha imtixaanka shaqaalaha oo dhamaan qaabab kale oo lagu sameeyo warqada Carabiga ah oo ku qoran shaqada dib u dhigista iyo shaqo qaybsiga caadiga ah.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system som har använts i Task1 Affect i Tweets. Vi kombinerar två olika tillvägagångssätt. Den första kallas N-Stream ConvNets, vilket är en djupinlärningsmetod där den andra är XGboost regressor baserad på en uppsättning inbäddnings- och lexikonbaserade funktioner. Vårt system utvärderades på testuppsättningar av uppgifter som överträffar alla andra metoder för den arabiska versionen av valensintensitetsregressionsuppgiften och valensordinalklassifikationsuppgiften.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری سیسٹم کو توئیٹوں میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے ہم دو مختلف طریقے جمع کرتے ہیں۔ پہلی ایسا ہے جو N-Stream ConvNets کا نام ہے، جو ایک عمیق سیکھنے کا طریقہ ہے جہاں دوسرا ہے XGboost regressor بننے اور لکسانز کی بنیاد رکھنے والی ویٹیوں پر بنیاد ہے. ہماری سیسٹم کو آزمائش سٹوں پر مطابق کیا گیا تھا جو تمام دوسرے مطابق کاموں کی آزمائش سٹوں پر قائم ہوا تھا جو عربی نسخہ کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق اور مطابق اورالڈی کل', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz Twitterda Vazifaning 1- tashkilotda ishlatilgan tizimmizni anglatadi. Biz ikkita boshqa usulni birlashtiramiz. Birinchi narsa N-Stream ConvNets (N-Stream ConvNets) deb nomlangan birinchi o'rganish usuli, bu ikkinchi XGboost boshqaruvchisi, birinchi cheksiz va leksikanlar asosidagi imkoniyatlar asosida asoslangan. Bizning tizimmiz haqida boshqa qanday narsalarni arab versiyasi uchun boshqa narsalarni o'rganish jarayonlariga qiymati edi, va taʼminlovchi oddiy darajalik vazifasi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống của chúng tôi đã được dùng trong bộ sửa đổi Task1 trong Tweet. Chúng ta kết hợp hai cách tiếp cận. Cái thứ nhất được gọi là phiếu chuyển hóa luồng, một phương pháp học sâu, nơi thứ hai là sự thụt lùi XGupst dựa trên một chuỗi các tính năng: Hệ thống của chúng tôi đã được đánh giá qua các nhóm thử nghiệm của các công việc hoàn thiện tất cả các phương pháp khác cho phiên bản Á Rập của nhiệm vụ phục hồi độ cao và nhiệm vụ phân tích hợp lệ.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav koji je korišten u posljedici Task1 u Tweets-u. Kombiniramo dva različita pristupa. Prvi po imenu N-Stream ConvNets, koji je duboki pristup učenja gdje je drugi regressor XGboost na temelju kompleta ugrađenih i leksikonskih karakteristika. Naš sustav je procijenjen na testiranjima setima zadataka koji su iznosili sve ostale pristupe arapske verzije funkcije regresije valencijske intenzitete i odgovarajuće odgovarajuće klasifikacije.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system, der er blevet brugt i Opgave 1 Affect in Tweets. Vi kombinerer to forskellige metoder. Den første kaldes N-Stream ConvNets, som er en dyb læring tilgang, hvor den anden er XGboost regressor baseret på et sæt integrering og leksikoner baserede funktioner. Vores system blev evalueret på testsæt af de opgaver, der oversteg alle andre tilgange til den arabiske version af valens intensitet regressionsopgave og valens ordinær klassifikationsopgave.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft ons systeem dat is gebruikt in Task1 Affect in Tweets. We combineren twee verschillende benaderingen. De eerste heet N-Stream ConvNets, wat een deep learning benadering is waarbij de tweede XGboost regressor is gebaseerd op een reeks embedding en lexicons gebaseerde functies. Ons systeem werd geëvalueerd op de testsets van de taken die alle andere benaderingen overtreffen voor de Arabische versie van valentieintensiteitsregressietaak en valentieordinaal classificatietaak.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата система, която е била използвана в Задача 1 в Туитс. Комбинираме два различни подхода. Първият, наречен N-Stream ConvNets, който е подход за дълбоко обучение, при който вторият е регресор базиран на набор от вграждане и лексикони базирани функции. Системата ни беше оценена върху тестовите комплекти на задачите, изпълняващи всички останали подходи за арабската версия на задачата за регресия на интензивността на валентността и задачата за класификация на валентността.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier beschreibt unser System, das in Task1 Affect in Tweets verwendet wurde. Wir kombinieren zwei verschiedene Ansätze. Der erste nennt sich N-Stream ConvNets, ein Deep Learning Ansatz, bei dem der zweite XGboost Regressor basierend auf einer Reihe von Einbettungs- und Lexikon-basierten Funktionen ist. Unser System wurde anhand der Testsätze der Aufgaben evaluiert, die alle anderen Ansätze für die arabische Version der Valenzintensitätsregressionsaufgabe und der Valenzordinalklassifikationsaufgabe übertreffen.', 'id': 'This paper describes our system that has been used in Task1 Affect in Tweets.  Kita menggabungkan dua pendekatan yang berbeda. Yang pertama disebut N-Stream ConvNets, yang merupakan pendekatan belajar dalam di mana yang kedua adalah regresor XGboost berdasarkan set karakteristik berbasis embedding dan lexicon. Sistem kami telah diuji pada set tes tugas yang melebihi semua pendekatan lain untuk versi Arab tugas regresi intensitas valensi dan tugas klasifikasi ordinal valensi.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را توصیف می\u200cکند که در تاثیر Task1 در Tweets استفاده شده است. ما دو دستور متفاوت را ترکیب می کنیم. اولین نفر به نام N-Stream ConvNets، که یک روش یادگیری عمیق است که دومین نفر به عنوان یک مجموعه از ویژه\u200cهای بنیاد گیری و لکسیون است. سیستم ما در مجموعه\u200cهای آزمایش کار\u200cهایی که بیشتر از همه\u200cی برخورد\u200cهای دیگر برای نسخه\u200cی ارتباط عربی از کار گریزی شدت ارتباط و دستور گریزی قانونی ارتباط دارند ارتباط داده شد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu uliotumika katika Task 1 Affect kwenye twita. Tunaunganisha njia mbili tofauti. Kitu cha kwanza kinaitwa N-Stream ConvNets, ambacho ni mbinu za kujifunza kwa kina ambapo pili ni mfanyakazi wa XGboost kwa kutumia seti ya utambulisho na vifaa vya lexico. Mfumo wetu ulitatuliwa katika mfululizo wa majaribio ya kazi zinazoonyesha njia nyingine zote kwa ajili ya toleo la Kiarabu la kuongezeka kwa kiwango kikubwa cha ukandamizaji na kazi ya usambazaji wa kawaida.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan sistemin tonë që është përdorur në Task1 Affect në Tweets. Ne kombinojmë dy metoda të ndryshme. E para e quajtur N-Stream ConvNets, e cila është një qasje mësimi i thellë ku e dyta është regresori XGboost bazuar në një sërë karakteristikësh të bazuara në përfshirje dhe lexikona. Sistemi ynë u vlerësua në grupet e testimeve të detyrave që kalonin të gjitha qasjet e tjera për versionin arab të detyrës së regresionit të intensitetit të valencës dhe detyrës së klasifikimit ordinal të valencës.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel wat gebruik is in Taak1 Afteks in Tweets. Ons kombinieer twee verskillende toegang. Die eerste een wat N- Stream ConvNets genoem word, wat is 'n diep leer toegang waar die tweede een is XGboost regressor gebaseer op 'n stel van inbêring en lexicons gebaseerde funksies. Ons stelsel is geevalueer op die toets stelle van die taak wat uitvoer alle ander toegang vir die Arabiese weergawe van valensieintensiteit regresie taak en valensies ordeel klassifikasie taak.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň sistemimizi tweets içinde ullanýan täzeliklerde tassyýar. Biz iki farklı golaýy birleşdirýäris. Ilkinji N-Stream ConvNets adlanýan, ikinjisi diňe gaty öwrenmek nusgasy. Bu ikinjisi XGboost regressor düzümlerniň içine daşary we leksikonslaryň düzümlerniň üstine daşary. Biziň sistemamyz görevleri barlamak üçin beýleki yollary arap wersiýasynda deňlendirildi.', 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ ስራ 1 በተዊተሮች ውስጥ የተጠቀመውን ስርዓታችንን ይናገራል፡፡ ሁለትን ልዩ ደረጃዎች እናሳብቃለን ። የፊተኛይቱ N-Stream ConvNets የሚባል ጥልቅ ትምህርት ማድረግ ነው፤ ሁለተኛውም የXGboost ሥርዓት በተመሳሳይ አካባቢ እና የሜክሲኮች ምርጫዎች በመሠረት ላይ ነው፡፡ ስርዓታችን ለዓረባዊ ግንኙነት አካባቢ ክፍል እና የግንኙነት ትክክለኛ ስራ እና የግንኙነት ትክክለኛ ትክክል ስራ በማድረግ የሚደረገውን ስርዓቶችን በመፈተና ላይ ተፈትኖ ነበር፡፡', 'ko': '이 문서는 Task1 영향 트윗에 사용된 시스템을 소개합니다.우리는 두 가지 다른 방법을 결합시켰다.첫 번째는 N-Stream convnet이라고 하는데 이것은 심도 있는 학습 방법이고, 두 번째는 끼워 넣고 사전을 바탕으로 하는 특징을 바탕으로 하는 XGboost 회귀기이다.아랍어판의 가격-강도 회귀 임무와 가격-순서 분류 임무에서 우리 시스템은 임무 테스트집에서 모든 다른 방법보다 우수한 평가를 실시했다.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգը, որը օգտագործվել է Թվիթերում "Աֆեկտ1" խնդիրներում: Մենք համադրում ենք երկու տարբեր մոտեցումներ: Առաջինը, որը կոչվում է N-Սթրեմ Կանվինթես, որը խորը սովորելու մոտեցում է, որտեղ երկրորդը XGBoost ռեգրեսոր է, հիմնված ներգրավման և լեքսիկոնների հիմնված հատկությունների մի շարքում: Մեր համակարգը գնահատվել է վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ բոլոր այլ մոտեցումներին, որոնք արտահայտվել են վալենսի ինտենսիվության ռեգրեսիայի վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ և վալենսի', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem koji je korišten u posljedici Task1 u Tweets-u. Kombiniramo dva različita pristupa. Prvi po imenu N-Stream ConvNets, koji je duboki pristup učenja gdje je drugi XGboost regressor baziran na setu ugrađenih i leksikonskih karakteristika. Naš sistem je procijenjen na testiranjima setima zadataka koji su iznosili sve ostale pristupe arapske verzije funkcije regresije valencijske intenzitete i odgovarajuće redovne klasifikacije.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt tövidlərdə istifadə edilən sistemimizi Tövidlərdə təsdiqləyir. Biz iki müxtəlif tərəfləri birləşdiririk. N-Stream ConvNets adlanmış ilk kişi, ikinci kişi XGboost regressor idi. İndi və leksikonların tərəfindən dayanan fəaliyyətlərə dayanan növbənöv öyrənmə tərzidir. Sistemimiz çətinliklərin imtahana çəkilməsində, hər hansı başqa tərzlərini arab verziji ilə çətinliklərinin reaksiyonu və eyniliklərin düzgün klasifikasiya görevlərinin başqa tərzlərindən üstün tutulmuşdu.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema que s'ha utilitzat en Task1 Affect on Tweets. We combine two different approaches.  El primer anomenat N-Stream ConvNets, que és un enfocament d'aprenentatge profund on el segon és un regressor XGboost basat en un conjunt de característiques basades en incorporació i lexicòns. El nostre sistema va ser avaluat en els conjunts de proves de les tasques que superaven tots els altres enfocaments per a la versió àrab de la tasca de regressió d'intensitat de valencia i la tasca de classificació ordinal de valencia.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém, který byl použit v Task1 Affect ve Tweetech. Kombinujeme dva různé přístupy. První z nich se nazývá N-Stream ConvNets, což je hluboký přístup učení, kde druhý je XGboost regressor založený na sadě vložení a lexikonů založených na funkcích. Náš systém byl hodnocen na testovacích sadách úloh, které překonaly všechny ostatní přístupy pro arabskou verzi regresní úlohy valenční intenzity a úlohy valenční ordinální klasifikace.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা আমাদের সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করছে যা টুইটে কাজ করা হয়েছে। আমরা দুটো ভিন্ন উপায় একত্রিত করি। প্রথমটির নাম N-স্ট্রীম কনভেন্টস, যা গভীর শিক্ষার উপায়, যেখানে দ্বিতীয় এক্সজিবুস্ট প্রতিষ্ঠাতার ভিত্তিতে এক বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন আমাদের সিস্টেমের পরীক্ষার বিষয়গুলোতে পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে যারা আরবী ভ্যালেন্স পুনরুদ্ধার করার ক্ষেত্রে অন্যান্য উপায় প্রকাশ করেছে এবং', 'et': 'Selles artiklis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi, mida on kasutatud funktsioonis Task1 Affect tweets. Me ühendame kaks erinevat lähenemisviisi. Esimene neist nimetatakse N-Stream ConvNets, mis on sügavõppe lähenemisviis, kus teine on XGboost regressor, mis põhineb põimimis- ja leksikonipõhistel funktsioonidel. Meie süsteemi hinnati valentsusintensiivsuse regressiooniülesande araabia versiooni ja valentsusordinaali klassifitseerimisülesande testimise kogumite alusel.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmäämme, jota on käytetty Tweetsin Task 1 Affect -ohjelmassa. Yhdistämme kaksi erilaista lähestymistapaa. Ensimmäinen on nimeltään N-Stream ConvNets, joka on syväoppimisen lähestymistapa, jossa toinen on XGboost regressori, joka perustuu joukko upotus- ja sanastopohjaisia ominaisuuksia. Järjestelmäämme arvioitiin kaikkien muiden lähestymistapojen ylittävien tehtävien testaussarjojen perusteella valenssiintensiteetin regressiotehtävässä arabialaisessa versiossa ja valenssiordinaaliluokitustehtävässä.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו שנשתמשה בתפקיד משימה 1 בטוויטים. אנחנו משלבים שני גישות שונות. הראשון שנקרא N-Stream ConvNets, אשר הוא גישה למידה עמוקה שבו השנייה היא XGboost regressor מבוסס על קבוצה של תכונות מבוססים בלקסיקונים. המערכת שלנו הוערכה על קבוצות הבדיקות של המשימות שמעבירות את כל גישות אחרות לגרסה הערבית של משימת גירוס אינטנסיביות ואנטנסיבות משימת סיווג מיוחדת.', 'sk': 'Ta članek opisuje naš sistem, ki je bil uporabljen v Opravilo 1 Affect v Tweets. Združujemo dva različna pristopa. Prvi se imenuje N-Stream ConvNets, ki je pristop globokega učenja, kjer je drugi regressor XGboost, ki temelji na nizu funkcij vdelave in leksikonov. Naš sistem smo ocenili na podlagi testiranja nalog, ki so presegle vse ostale pristope za arabsko različico naloge regresijske intenzivnosti valence in naloge klasifikacije valence ordinal.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana na'urarmu wanda aka yi amfani da cikin Task1 Affect cikin Twitter. Munã haɗa hanyõyi biyu dabam-dabam. Babba ta farkon da aka kallo N-mitam ConvNets, yana da wata matsayi mai girma a karantawa inda na biyu na zama XGboost regressor based on wani set of embedding and leksis-based feature. An ƙaddara kanmu a kan jarrabi masu aikin da ke samun duk hanyõyi na arabu wa aikin da aka haramta wa matabbaci da kuma na sami aikin mai fassarar fassarar.", 'jv': 'Workspace 1 Awak dhéwé pisan minggu kabèh sampeyan. Awak dhéwé sing dipunangé N-Striam conv nets, iki wis dipunangé awak dhéwé kuwi wis dipunangé sekondi, nambah dhéwé wis régres XGBOst dipunangé awak dhéwé lan leksikono sing bisa basa. Sistem dhéwé wis dipatensi nang ujian akeh operasi sing beraksi dadi nggawe ngubah akeh operasi sing gawe ngubah versi arab kanggo ngubah apakno sing beraksi tambah karo iCalendar', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དུས་ཚོད་Tweets་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཡོད་པའི་ལུགས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་མི་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་མཉམ་བསྡོམས་ཡོད། The first one called N-Stream ConvNets, which is a deep learning approach where the second one is XGboost regressor based on a set of embedding and lexicons based features. Our system was evaluated on the testing sets of the tasks outperforming all other approaches for the Arabic version of valence intensity regression task and valence ordinal classification task.'}
{'en': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Classification of Tweets using Multiple Thresholds with Self-correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities', 'ar': 'CENTEMENT في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: تصنيف التغريدات باستخدام عتبات متعددة مع التصحيح الذاتي والاحتمالات المشروطة المرجحة', 'es': 'CENTEMENT en Semeval-2018 Tarea 1: Clasificación de tuits mediante umbrales múltiples con autocorrección y probabilidades condicionales ponderadas', 'fr': "CENTEMENT au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Classification des Tweets à l'aide de seuils multiples avec auto-correction et probabilités conditionnelles pondérées", 'pt': 'CENTEMENT no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Classificação de Tweets usando múltiplos limites com autocorreção e probabilidades condicionais ponderadas', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のCENTEMENTタスク1 ：自己補正と加重条件付き確率を伴う複数のしきい値を使用したツイートの分類', 'ru': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Classification of Tweets using Multiple Thresholds with Self-correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities', 'zh': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 任1:用有自校加权概率数阈值推文分', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर CENTEMENT: स्व-सुधार और भारित सशर्त संभावनाओं के साथ एकाधिक थ्रेशोल्ड का उपयोग करके ट्वीट्स का वर्गीकरण', 'ga': 'CENTEMENT ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Aicmiú Tweetanna ag baint úsáide as Tairseacha Iolracha le Féincheartúchán agus Dóchúlachtaí Coinníollacha Ualaithe', 'ka': 'CENTEMENT semiEval-2018 დავალება 1: Tweets- ის კლასიფიკაცია, გამოყენებული მრავალური კონტაქტის გამოყენება თავისუფლიო რედაქტირებით და უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი შესაძლებლობაით', 'kk': 'CENTEMENT 1- жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында: Бірнеше ілеспелерді өзіңіздің түзету және бағалау шарттарының мүмкіндігін қолданатын Tweets классификациясы', 'lt': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Classification of Tweets using Multiple Thresholds with Self-Correction and Weighted Conditional Probability', 'hu': 'Központ a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Tweetek osztályozása több küszöbérték használatával önkorrekcióval és súlyozott feltételes valószínűséggel', 'el': 'ΚΕΝΤΡΟ στο έργο 1: Ταξινόμηση των Τουίτ χρησιμοποιώντας Πολλαπλά Όρια με Αυτοδιόρθωση και Ζυγισμένες Πιθανότητες Υπόθεσης', 'mk': 'ЦЕНТЕНТЕНТ на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Класификација на твитови користејќи многуте граници со самокорекција и тешки условни веројатности', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്കില്\u200d സെന്\u200dറെമെന്റ്: സ്വയം സ്വീകരിക്കുന്നതും ഉയര്\u200dന്ന സാധ്യതയുള്ള സാധ്യതകളുമായി പല ത്രീഷോള്\u200dഡുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച', 'mn': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Classification of Multiple Thresholds using Self-correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities', 'ms': 'CENTEMENT di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Klasifikasi Tweets menggunakan Banyak Hadapan dengan Pembetulan-diri dan Kemungkinan Suara Berberat', 'no': 'CENTEMENT ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Klassifikasjon av tweeter med fleire trådar med selvkorreksjon og vekte vilkårleg sannsynlighetar', 'it': 'CENTEMENT a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Classificazione dei Tweet utilizzando Soglie Multiple con Auto-Correzione e Probabilità Condizionate Pesate', 'si': 'CENTEMENT at Half-2018 Job 1: Classication of Tweets Using MultiThresholds with Self-correction and Weight Condition Chances', 'pl': 'CENTEMENT na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Klasyfikacja tweetów przy użyciu wielu progów z samokreśleniem i ważonymi warunkowymi prawdopodobieństwami', 'sr': 'CENTEMENT na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: Klasifikacija Tweets koristeći višestruke pretnje sa samookorekcijom i većim uvjetnim verovatnošću', 'so': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Classification of Tweets using Multiple Thresholds with Self-correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities', 'sv': 'CENTEMENT på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Klassificering av tweets med flera tröskelvärden med självkorrigering och viktade villkorliga sannolikheter', 'ur': 'سیمئولی-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں سینٹیمینٹ: ٹویٹ کی کلاسیفٹ کرتی ہے اپنے سیدھی اصلاح اور وزن کی وضعیت احتمالات کے مطابق', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் சென்டெமென்ட்: தன்னை திருத்தம் மற்றும் உயரமான நிபந்தனையான சாத்தியங்களுடன் பல துணுக்குகளை பயன்படுத்தி தன்னுடைய இரு', 'mt': 'ĊENTENT f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Tweets bl-użu ta’ Limiti Multipli b’Awtokorrezzjoni u Probabbiltajiet Kundizzjonali Piżati', 'ro': 'CENTEMENT la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Clasificarea tweeturilor folosind praguri multiple cu auto-corecție și probabilități condiționale ponderate', 'uz': '1: Avto- to\xa0Ľg\xa0Ľrilash va katta ta\xa0ľminlovchi Probablik bilan bir nechta marta- xabarlarni foydalanish', 'vi': 'Giao kèo tại SemEvl-208 Task 1: Classification of tweets with Multiple Thresholds with Self Corrections và Weight conditional Probabties', 'bg': 'ЦЕНТМЕНТ в Задача 1: Класификация на туитове с използване на множество прагове със самокорекция и претеглени условни вероятности', 'da': 'CENTEMENT ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Klassificering af tweets ved hjælp af flere tærskler med selvkorrektion og vægtede betingede sandsynligheder', 'de': 'Aufgabe 1: Klassifizierung von Tweets unter Verwendung mehrerer Schwellenwerte mit Selbstkorrektur und gewichteten bedingten Wahrscheinlichkeiten', 'nl': 'CENTEMENT bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Classificatie van Tweets met Meerdere Drempels met Zelfcorrectie en Gewichte Voorwaardelijke Waarschijnlijkheid', 'hr': 'CENTEMENT na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 1: klasifikacija Tweets korištenja višestrukih Thresholda sa samoopravljenim i težim uvjetnim vjerojatnošću', 'fa': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Classification of Tweets using Multiple Thresholds with Self-correction and Weighted Conditions', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 1: 트윗을 자체 보정 및 가중 조건 확률이 있는 다중 임계값으로 분류', 'tr': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Classification of Multiple Thresholds using Self-correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities', 'sw': 'CENTEMENT kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Kutangaza kwa Twita kwa kutumia vituo vingi vya kujisahihi na uwezekano wa hali ya kawaida', 'am': '1: Classification of Tweets using multiple Thresholds with self-correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities', 'id': 'CENTEMENT di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Klasifikasi Tweets menggunakan Banyak Tanggal dengan Koreksi Sendiri dan Kemungkinan Kondisional Berberat', 'af': 'CENTEMENT by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: Klassifikasie van tweete gebruik veelvuldige drempelde met Self-korreksie en gewigte betingelike waarskynlikheid', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের সেন্টেমেন্ট ১: স্বার্থ সংস্কার এবং উচ্চ পরিস্থিতির সম্ভাবনা সহযোগে বহুগুণ টুইট ব্যবহার করে টুইটারের ব্যবহার করে ট', 'sq': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Classification of Tweets using Multiple Limits with Self-Correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities', 'ca': 'CENTEMENT a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Classification of Tweets using Multiple Thresholds with Self-correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities', 'hy': 'CENCENT-ը, 2018 թվականի կիսահավասարման առաջին խնդիր. Tweet-ների դասակարգումը օգտագործելով բազմաթիվ սահմանափակումներ ինքնաուղղությամբ և կշռությամբ պայմանավոր հավանականություններով', 'az': 'CENTEMENT at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Özünün düzəltməsi və Cənnətləşdirilmiş şəkildə mümkün olaraq çoxlu Sıradan istifadə edən Tweets klasifikasyonu', 'fi': 'KESKUS SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Tweettien luokittelu useilla kynnysarvoilla itsekorjauksella ja painotetuilla ehdollisilla todennäköisyyksillä', 'cs': 'Úkol 1: Klasifikace tweetů s využitím více prahových hodnot se sebeopravou a váženými podmíněnými pravděpodobnostmi', 'bs': 'CENTEMENT na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 1: Klasifikacija Tweets koristeći višestruke Thresholds samoporavnim i težim uvjetnim vjerojatnošću', 'et': 'KESKUS SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Tweetide klassifitseerimine mitme künnise abil koos enesekorrektsiooni ja kaalutud tingimuslike tõenäosustega', 'jv': 'CeENTEMENT at semiinval-2013', 'sk': 'CENTEMENT na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Klasifikacija tweetov z uporabo več pragov s samopopravkom in tehtanimi pogojnimi verjetnostmi', 'he': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Classification of Tweets using Multiple Thresholds with Self-correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacter', 'bo': 'CENTEMENT at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Classification of Tweets using Multiple Thresholds with Self-correction and Weighted Conditional Probabilities'}
{'en': 'In this paper we present our contribution to SemEval-2018, a classifier for classifying multi-label emotions of Arabic and English tweets. We attempted Affect in Tweets, specifically Task E-c : Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification). Our method is based on preprocessing the tweets and creating word vectors combined with a self correction step to remove noise. We also make use of emotion specific thresholds. The final submission was selected upon the best performance achieved, selected when using a range of thresholds. Our system was evaluated on the Arabic and English datasets provided for the task by the competition organisers, where it ranked 2nd for the Arabic dataset (out of 14 entries) and 12th for the English dataset (out of 35 entries).', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث نقدم مساهمتنا في SemEval-2018 ، وهو مصنف لتصنيف المشاعر متعددة العلامات للتغريدات العربية والإنجليزية. لقد حاولنا "التأثير في التغريدات" ، وتحديدًا المهمة الإلكترونية ج: اكتشاف المشاعر (تصنيف متعدد التصنيفات). تعتمد طريقتنا على المعالجة المسبقة للتغريدات وإنشاء متجهات الكلمات جنبًا إلى جنب مع خطوة التصحيح الذاتي لإزالة الضوضاء. نحن أيضًا نستفيد من عتبات معينة للعاطفة. تم اختيار التقديم النهائي بناءً على أفضل أداء تم تحقيقه ، وتم اختياره عند استخدام مجموعة من العتبات. تم تقييم نظامنا بناءً على مجموعات البيانات العربية والإنجليزية المقدمة للمهمة من قبل منظمي المسابقة ، حيث احتل المرتبة الثانية لمجموعة البيانات العربية (من 14 إدخالاً) والمرتبة 12 لمجموعة البيانات الإنجليزية (من أصل 35 إدخالاً).', 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos nuestra contribución a SemEval-2018, un clasificador para clasificar las emociones multietiqueta de los tuits árabes e ingleses. Intentamos «Afectar en los Tweets», específicamente la Tarea e-C: Detección de emociones (clasificación de etiquetas múltiples). Nuestro método se basa en preprocesar los tuits y crear vectores de palabras combinados con un paso de autocorrección para eliminar el ruido. También utilizamos umbrales específicos de las emociones. La presentación final se seleccionó según el mejor rendimiento alcanzado, seleccionado cuando se utilizó un rango de umbrales. Nuestro sistema fue evaluado en los conjuntos de datos en árabe e inglés proporcionados para la tarea por los organizadores de la competencia, donde ocupó el segundo lugar para el conjunto de datos árabe (de 14 entradas) y el duodécimo para el conjunto de datos inglés (de 35 entradas).', 'pt': 'Neste artigo apresentamos nossa contribuição ao SemEval-2018, um classificador para classificação de emoções multirrótulo de tweets em árabe e inglês. Tentamos “Afetar os Tweets”, especificamente a Tarefa E-c: Detectando Emoções (classificação multi-rótulo). Nosso método é baseado no pré-processamento dos tweets e na criação de vetores de palavras combinados com uma etapa de autocorreção para remover o ruído. Também fazemos uso de limiares específicos de emoção. A submissão final foi selecionada com base no melhor desempenho alcançado, selecionado ao usar uma série de limites. Nosso sistema foi avaliado nos conjuntos de dados em árabe e inglês fornecidos para a tarefa pelos organizadores da competição, onde ficou em 2º lugar para o conjunto de dados árabe (de 14 entradas) e 12º para o conjunto de dados em inglês (de 35 entradas).', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons notre contribution à SemEval-2018, un classificateur permettant de classer les émotions multi-étiquettes des tweets en arabe et en anglais. Nous avons essayé «\xa0Affect in Tweets\xa0», en particulier Task e-C\xa0: Detecting Emotions (classification multi-étiquettes). Notre méthode est basée sur le prétraitement des tweets et la création de vecteurs de mots combinés à une étape d'auto-correction pour supprimer le bruit. Nous utilisons également des seuils spécifiques aux émotions. La soumission finale a été sélectionnée en fonction de la meilleure performance atteinte, sélectionnée en utilisant une gamme de seuils. Notre système a été évalué sur les ensembles de données en arabe et en anglais fournis pour la tâche par les organisateurs du concours, où il s'est classé 2e pour le jeu de données arabe (sur 14 entrées) et 12e pour le jeu de données anglais (sur 35 entrées).", 'ja': 'この論文では、アラビア語と英語のツイートのマルチラベル感情を分類するための分類子であるSemEval -2018への貢献を紹介します。「ツイートに影響を与える」、特にタスクE - c ：感情の検出（マルチラベル分類）を試みました。私たちの方法は、ノイズを除去するための自己補正ステップと組み合わせて、ツイートを前処理し、ワードベクトルを作成することに基づいています。また、感情固有のしきい値を利用します。最終的な提出物は、達成された最高のパフォーマンスに基づいて選択され、さまざまなしきい値を使用して選択されました。当社のシステムは、コンペティション主催者によってタスクのために提供されたアラビア語と英語のデータセットで評価され、アラビア語データセットでは2位（ 14項目中）、英語データセットでは12位（ 35項目中）にランク付けされました。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем наш вклад в SemEval-2018, классификатор для классификации многоуровневых эмоций арабских и английских твитов. Мы попытались «воздействовать в твитах», в частности, Задача E-c: Обнаружение эмоций (многоуровневая классификация). Наш метод основан на предварительной обработке твитов и создании векторов слов в сочетании с шагом самокоррекции для устранения шума. Мы также используем специфические пороги эмоций. Окончательное представление было отобрано на основе наилучших достигнутых результатов, выбранных при использовании ряда пороговых значений. Наша система была оценена на арабском и английском наборах данных, предоставленных для задачи организаторами конкурса, где она заняла 2 место для арабского набора данных (из 14 записей) и 12 место для английского набора данных (из 35 записей).', 'zh': '本文,我们介了我们对SemEval-2018的贡献,SemEval-2018是一个分类器,用于对阿拉伯语和英语推文的多标签情情分类。 试推文中事,特为任E-c:检情(多标类)。 吾道基于预处理推文而创单词向量,并自校步骤以消噪音。 因情特定阈值。 终于用一阈值之最善者。 臣等统据竞组织者为阿拉伯语、英语数集评之,其阿拉伯语数集(于14参赛中)第二,英语数集(在35参赛)排名第12位。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम SemEval-2018 में अपना योगदान प्रस्तुत करते हैं, अरबी और अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स की बहु-लेबल भावनाओं को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए एक क्लासिफायर। हमने "Tweets में प्रभाव" का प्रयास किया, विशेष रूप से कार्य ई-सी: भावनाओं का पता लगाना (बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण)। हमारी विधि tweets preprocessing और शोर को दूर करने के लिए एक आत्म सुधार कदम के साथ संयुक्त शब्द वैक्टर बनाने पर आधारित है. हम भावना विशिष्ट थ्रेसहोल्ड का भी उपयोग करते हैं। अंतिम सबमिशन को प्राप्त सर्वोत्तम प्रदर्शन पर चुना गया था, जिसे थ्रेशोल्ड की एक श्रृंखला का उपयोग करते समय चुना गया था। हमारे सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन प्रतियोगिता आयोजकों द्वारा कार्य के लिए प्रदान किए गए अरबी और अंग्रेजी डेटासेट पर किया गया था, जहां यह अरबी डेटासेट (14 प्रविष्टियों में से) के लिए 2 वें स्थान पर था और अंग्रेजी डेटासेट (35 प्रविष्टियों में से) के लिए 12 वां स्थान था।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair ár ranníocaíocht le SemEval-2018, aicmitheoir chun mothúcháin illipéad tweets Araibis agus Béarla a rangú. Rinneamar iarracht “Affect in Tweets”, go sonrach Tasc E-c: Mothúcháin a Bhrath (rangú illipéid). Tá ár modh bunaithe ar na tweets a réamhphróiseáil agus veicteoirí focal a chruthú in éineacht le céim féincheartúcháin chun torann a bhaint. Bainimid úsáid freisin as tairseacha ar leith mothúcháin. Roghnaíodh an aighneacht deiridh ar an bhfeidhmíocht is fearr a baineadh amach, agus roghnaíodh é agus raon tairseacha á n-úsáid. Rinne eagraithe an chomórtais measúnú ar ár gcóras ar na tacair sonraí Araibis agus Béarla a chuir eagraithe an chomórtais ar fáil don tasc, áit a raibh sé sa 2ú háit don tacar sonraí Araibis (as 14 iontráil) agus sa 12ú háit don tacar sonraí Béarla (as 35 iontráil).', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენი დამატება SemEval-2018-ში, კლასიფიკაციელი, რამდენიმე ნიშნალური ემოციების კლასიფიკაციაში აპაბი და ინგლისური tweets-ზე. ჩვენ მოცდილობდით "Tweets" განსაკუთრებულად დავალება E- c: Emotions Detecting (multi- label classification). ჩვენი მეთოდი გადაწყენება ტევიტების პრეპროცესი და სიტყვების გვექტორების შექმნა, რომელიც თავისუფლიო კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფი ჩვენ ასევე ემოციონის განსაკუთრებული პროგრამების გამოყენება. საბოლოო დასაწყება მონიშნულია საუკეთესო გამოყენებაზე, როდესაც გამოყენება საბოლოო დასაწყება. ჩვენი სისტემა აპაბიური და ინგლისური მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც კონკრენტების ორგანიზატორისგან მონაცემების მონაცემების მეორე წერტილი (14 წერტილიდან) და 12 წერტილი ანგლისური მონაცემების მონა', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε τη συμβολή μας στο ένα ταξινομητή για την ταξινόμηση των συναισθημάτων πολλαπλών ετικετών στα αραβικά και τα αγγλικά tweets. Προσπαθήσαμε να "Επίδραση στα Τουίτ", συγκεκριμένα Εργασία Ε-γ: Ανίχνευση Συναισθημάτων (ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών ετικετών). Η μέθοδος μας βασίζεται στην προεπεξεργασία των tweets και τη δημιουργία διανυσμάτων λέξεων σε συνδυασμό με ένα βήμα αυτοδιόρθωσης για την απομάκρυνση του θορύβου. Χρησιμοποιούμε επίσης συγκεκριμένα όρια συναισθημάτων. Η τελική υποβολή επιλέχθηκε με βάση την καλύτερη απόδοση που επιτεύχθηκε, επιλέγοντας με τη χρήση μιας σειράς κατώτατων ορίων. Το σύστημά μας αξιολογήθηκε με βάση τα αραβικά και αγγλικά σύνολα δεδομένων που παρείχαν οι διοργανωτές του διαγωνισμού, όπου κατατάχθηκε 2η για το αραβικό σύνολο δεδομένων (από τις 14ες συμμετοχές) και 12η για το αγγλικό σύνολο δεδομένων (από τις 35 συμμετοχές).', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk hozzájárulásunkat a SemEval-2018-hoz, amely az arab és angol tweetek többcímkéjű érzelmeinek osztályozására szolgál. Megpróbáltuk az "érintett tweetekben" feladatot, különösen E-c feladatot: érzelmek felismerése (többcímkés osztályozás). Módszerünk a tweetek előfeldolgozásán és szóvektorok létrehozásán alapul, kombinálva egy önkorrekciós lépéssel a zaj eltávolítása érdekében. Érzelmi küszöbértékeket is alkalmazunk. A végleges benyújtást az elért legjobb teljesítmény alapján választották ki, és különböző küszöbértékek alkalmazásával választották ki. Rendszerünket a versenyszervezők által a feladatra rendelkezésre bocsátott arab és angol adatkészletek alapján értékeltük, ahol az arab adatkészlet (14 nevezés), az angol adatkészlet (35 nevezés) 2. helyezése lett.', 'it': 'In questo articolo presentiamo il nostro contributo a SemEval-2018, un classificatore per classificare le emozioni multi-etichetta dei tweet arabi e inglesi. Abbiamo provato "Affect in Tweets", in particolare Task E-c: Rilevare le emozioni (classificazione multi-etichetta). Il nostro metodo si basa sulla pre-elaborazione dei tweet e la creazione di vettori di parole combinati con un passaggio di auto correzione per rimuovere il rumore. Ci avvaliamo anche di soglie specifiche per le emozioni. La presentazione finale è stata selezionata in base alle migliori prestazioni raggiunte, selezionate utilizzando una serie di soglie. Il nostro sistema è stato valutato sulla base dei dataset arabo e inglese forniti per il compito dagli organizzatori del concorso, dove si è classificato secondo per il dataset arabo (su 14 voci) e dodicesimo per il dataset inglese (su 35 voci).', 'kk': "Бұл қағазда біз біздің бірнеше белгілер араб және ағылшын тейтеттерінің көп белгілер емоцияларын саластыру үшін SemEval-2018-ге қатынасызды таңдаймыз. Біз таңбашалардың 'Туиттерінің қасиеттері' деп пытақтадық, әдетте тапсырма E- c: көңіл күйлерін анықтау (көп белгілер классификациясы). Біздің әдіміміз tweetтерді алдын- ала өзгерту және сөз векторларын құру үшін дыбысты өшіру үшін бірге өзгерту қадамымен негізделген. Біз сондай-ақ емоциялардың өзгертілген шектерін қолданамыз. Соңғы жіберу сәтті бірнеше шектерді қолданғанда таңдалған ең жақсы жылдамдығында таңдалды. Біздің жүйеміз араб және ағылшын деректер қорларында тапсырманы бағалады, бұл ағылшын деректер қорларының (14 жазуларынан) 2- ші ретінде (35 жазуларынан) және 12- ші ретінде (ағылшын деректер қорларының).", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018-ലേക്ക് നമ്മുടെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അറബിക്കും ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ട്രെയിറ്റുകളുടെ പല ല We attempted 'Affect in Tweets', specifically Task E-c: Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification).  ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d മുന്നോട്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സൃഷ്ടി വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അവസാന സമ്പാദിച്ച ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d അവസാന സന്ദേശം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വിധി  ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു. പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്ന സംഘടനയുടെ ജോലിക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള അറബിയും ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ", 'mk': 'In this paper we present our contribution to SemEval-2018, a classifier for classifying multi-label emotions of Arabic and English tweets.  Се обидовме да „влијаеме на Твитовите“, специфично задачата Е-Ц: Детектирање на емоции (мултиетикетна класификација). Нашиот метод е базиран на препроцесот на твитови и создавање на вектори на зборови комбинирани со чекор на самокорекција за отстранување на бучава. Ние исто така користиме емоции специфични прагови. The final submission was selected upon the best performance achieved, selected when using a range of thresholds.  Our system was evaluated on the Arabic and English datasets provided for the task by the competition organisers, where it ranked 2nd for the Arabic dataset (out of 14 entries) and 12th for the English dataset (out of 35 entries).', 'lt': "Šiame dokumente pristatome savo indėlį į SemEval-2018, klasifikatorių klasifikuojantį daugiametes arabų ir anglų tweetų emocijas. We attempted 'Affect in Tweets', specifically Task E-c: Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification).  Our method is based on preprocessing the tweets and creating word vectors combined with a self correction step to remove noise.  We also make use of emotion specific thresholds.  The final submission was selected upon the best performance achieved, selected when using a range of thresholds.  Mūsų sistema buvo įvertinta remiantis arabų ir anglų duomenų rinkiniais, kuriuos atliko konkurso organizatoriai, kai ji buvo antra pagal arabų duomenų rinkinį (iš 14 įrašų) ir dvylika pagal anglų duomenų rinkinį (iš 35 įrašų).", 'ms': "In this paper we present our contribution to SemEval-2018, a classifier for classifying multi-label emotions of Arabic and English tweets.  Kami cuba 'Affect in Tweets', secara khusus Tugas E-c: Mengesan Emotions (klasifikasi multi-label). Our method is based on preprocessing the tweets and creating word vectors combined with a self correction step to remove noise.  Kami juga menggunakan ambang-ambang yang spesifik emosi. The final submission was selected upon the best performance achieved, selected when using a range of thresholds.  Sistem kami telah diuji pada set data Arab dan Inggeris yang disediakan untuk tugas oleh pengatur pertandingan, di mana ia ditangkap ke-2 untuk set data Arab (daripada 14 masukan) dan ke-12 untuk set data Inggeris (daripada 35 masukan).", 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument nippreżentaw il-kontribut tagħna għal SemEval-2018, klassifikatur għall-klassifikazzjoni ta’ emozzjonijiet multitikkettati ta’ tweets bl-Għarab u bl-Ingliż. Ippruvajna 'Affett in Tweets', speċifikament Kompitu E-c: Detezzjoni ta' Emozzjonijiet (klassifikazzjoni b'ħafna tikketti). Il-metodu tagħna huwa bbażat fuq l-ipproċessar minn qabel tat-tweets u l-ħolqien ta’ vetturi tal-kliem flimkien ma’ pass ta’ awtokorezzjoni biex jitneħħa l-istorbju. Aħna nużaw ukoll limiti speċifiċi għall-emozzjonijiet. The final submission was selected upon the best performance achieved, selected when using a range of thresholds.  Our system was evaluated on the Arabic and English datasets provided for the task by the competition organisers, where it ranked 2nd for the Arabic dataset (out of 14 entries) and 12th for the English dataset (out of 35 entries).", 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nasz wkład w SemEval-2018, klasyfikator do klasyfikacji multi-label emocji arabskich i angielskich tweetów. Próbowaliśmy "Affect in Tweets", konkretnie Zadanie E-c: Detection Emotions (wieloznakowa klasyfikacja). Nasza metoda opiera się na wstępnym przetwarzaniu tweetów i tworzeniu wektorów słowa w połączeniu z krokiem autokorekcji w celu usunięcia szumu. Wykorzystujemy również progi specyficzne dla emocji. Ostateczny wniosek został wybrany na podstawie najlepszych osiągniętych osiągniętych wyników, wybrany przy użyciu szeregu progów. Nasz system został oceniony na podstawie arabskich i angielskich zbiorów danych dostarczonych do zadania przez organizatorów konkursu, gdzie zajął drugi miejsce dla arabskiego zbioru danych (spośród 14-tych zgłoszeń) i 12-ty dla angielskiego (spośród 35 zgłoszeń).', 'sr': "U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš doprinos semiEvalu-2018, klasifikaciji za klasifikaciju višeetičnih emocija arapskih i engleskih tweeta. Pokušali smo 'uticaj na Tweets', posebno zadatak E-c: otkrivanje emocija (klasifikacija multietiketa). Naša metoda je zasnovana na preobrađivanju tweeta i stvaranju vektora riječi kombinovanih sa korakom samooprave kako bi uklonili buku. Takođe koristimo posebne praške emocija. Posljednja podnošenja je izabrana na najboljem postignutom provedbi, odabrana kada koristi niz praga. Naš sistem je procenio na arapskim i engleskim podacima koji su predložili zadatak organizatorima natjecanja, gde je postavio 2. za arpski podaci (od 14 ulaza) i 12. za engleski podaci (od 35 ulaza).", 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi vårt bidrag til semiEval-2018, ein klassifisering for å klassifisera fleire merkelapper følelser av arabiske og engelske tweeter. Vi prøvde å «Etter i Tweets», spesielt oppgåve E- c: Finn følelser (klassifikasjon med fleire merkelappar). Metoden vårt er basert på forhandtering av tweetene og oppretting av ordvektorar kombinasjon med ein sjølvkorrigeringssteg for å fjerna støy. Vi gjer også bruk av emosjonsspesifikke grenseverdiar. Den siste sendinga vart valt ved den beste utviklinga som er oppnådd, valde når du brukar eit rekkjefølgje av grenseverdiar. Systemet vårt er evaluert på datasettet i arabisk og engelsk som er tilgjengeleg for oppgåva av konkurransa-organisatorene, der det rangerte 2. for datasettet i arabisk (frå 14 oppgåver) og 12. for datasettet i engelsk (frå 35 oppgåver).', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm contribuția noastră la SemEval-2018, un clasificator pentru clasificarea emoțiilor multi-etichete ale tweeturilor arabe și engleze. Am încercat "Afect în Tweets", în special Sarcina E-c: Detectarea emoțiilor (clasificare multi-label). Metoda noastră se bazează pe pre-procesarea tweeturilor și crearea vectorilor de cuvinte combinate cu un pas de auto-corecție pentru a elimina zgomotul. De asemenea, folosim praguri specifice emoțiilor. Prezentarea finală a fost selectată în funcție de cea mai bună performanță obținută, selectată atunci când se utilizează o serie de praguri. Sistemul nostru a fost evaluat pe baza seturilor de date arabe și engleze puse la dispoziție de organizatorii concursului, unde s-a clasat pe locul 2 pentru setul de date arab (din 14 intrări) și pe locul 12 pentru setul de date englezesc (din 35 intrări).', 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපි අපේ සම්වේල් 2018 වලට පෙන්වන්නේ, අරාබි සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් වලින් විශේෂකයෙන් විශේෂකයෙක්. අපි ට්විට්ස් වල 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න' උත්සාහ කළා, විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් වැඩ E- c: භාවිතය හොයාගන්න අපේ විධානය තවිට් වලින් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය කරන්න සහ වචන වෙක්ටර් වලින් හදන්න සමග ස්වයංග්\u200dරහයක් සම්බන්ධ ව අපි හැඟීම් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අන්තිම පිළිබඳය තෝරාගත්තා හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා, තෝරාගත්තා ප්\u200dරමාණයක් භාවිත කරන්න. අපේ පද්ධතිය අරාබි සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි දත්ත සේට් වලින් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ අරාබි දත්ත සේට් වලින්, අරාබි දත්ත සේට් වලින් අරාබි දත්ත සේට", 'so': "Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa qeybtayada SemEval-2018, kaas oo fasax u ah fasaxa fikrada badan oo af Carabi iyo Ingiriis ah. Waxaan isku daynay 'Affect in Tweets', khaas ahaan shaqo E-c: Fiirid Emotions (fasax kala duduwan). Metalkeenu waxay ku saleysan tahay ka hor baaraandegista tweetyada iyo abuurista qaababka hadalka oo la isku xiran karo tallaabo hagaajiya si uu codka u qaado. Sidoo kale waxaynu isticmaalaynaa dareemaha cayiman. Submitiga ugu dambeeya waxaa lagu doortay marka lagu isticmaalo dariiqado kala duduwan. Systemkanaga waxaa lagu qiimeeyay kooxda macluumaadka afka Carabiga iyo Ingiriiska, kuwaas oo qabanqaabiyayaasha iskaashatada u qabanqaabiyey, taas oo lagu qoray qoraalka macluumaadka Carabiga (14-galyada) iyo 12aad oo loogu talagalay macluumaadka ingiriiska (35-galyada).", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2018 онд тусламжтайгаа илэрхийлж байна. Араб болон Англи tweets дээр олон загварын сэтгэл хөдлөлийг ангилахын тулд олон загварын түвшинд ангилалдаг. Бид "Tweets-д нөлөөлдөг нөлөөлдөг" гэж оролдсон, ялангуяа "E-c" Task: Emotions Detecting (олон-label classification). Бидний арга нь бичлэгүүдийг өмнө үйлдвэрлэх болон үг векторуудыг өөрийгөө засах алхам дээр суурилсан. Мөн бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тодорхой хэмжээсүүдийг ашигладаг. Эцсийн даалгавар нь хамгийн сайн даалгавар дээр сонгогдсон, хэдэн хэмжээсүүдийг ашиглах үед сонгогдсон. Бидний систем Араб болон Англи хэлний өгөгдлийн санд өрсөлдөөний органистуудын ажилд зориулагдсан бөгөөд энэ нь Араб өгөгдлийн санд (14 entries) 2, Англи өгөгдлийн санд (35 entries) 12.', 'ur': "اس کاغذ میں ہم نے SemEval-2018 میں ہمارا حصہ پیش کیا ہے، عربی اور انگلیسی ٹویٹوں کی بہت سی لیبل احساسات کا کلاس کرنے کے لئے ایک کلاسیر. ہم نے 'ٹویٹوں میں اثر' کی کوشش کی، مخصوصاً ٹاکس ایک: ایموٹیزوں کا پتچا کرنا (ملتی-لابل کلاسپیٹ) ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ ٹویٹوں کی پیش پردازی پر بنیاد ہے اور کلمات ویکتروں کی پیدائش کرتی ہے جو غږ کو دور کرنے کے لئے اپنی سیدھی سیدھی قدم سے ملے جاتے ہیں۔ ہم بھی احساسات مخصوص دہرائیل سے استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ آخری مسلمانوں کو بہترین کامل پر انتخاب کیا گیا تھا، جبکہ ایک دہرائی ڈالٹ کے استعمال میں انتخاب کیا گیا تھا. ہمارا سیستم عربی اور انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ پر مطالبہ کیا گیا تھا جہاں اس نے عربی ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے دوسرا رقم کیا تھا اور انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے دوسرا رقم کیا تھا۔", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi vårt bidrag till SemEval-2018, en klassificerare för klassificering av flera etiketter känslor av arabiska och engelska tweets. Vi försökte "Affect in Tweets", särskilt Uppgift E-c: Detecting Emotions (multi-label klassificering). Vår metod bygger på förbehandling av tweets och skapande av ordvektorer kombinerat med ett självkorrigeringssteg för att ta bort brus. Vi använder oss också av känslospecifika trösklar. Den slutliga inlämningen valdes ut på grundval av den bästa prestationen som uppnåtts och valdes ut vid användning av ett antal tröskelvärden. Vårt system utvärderades utifrån de arabiska och engelska datauppsättningar som tävlingsarrangörerna tillhandahöll för uppgiften, där det rankades 2:a för den arabiska datauppsättningen (av 14 bidrag) och 12:e för den engelska datauppsättningen (av 35 bidrag).', 'ta': "In this paper we present our contribution to SemEval-2018, a classifier for classifying multi-label emotions of Arabic and English tweets.  நாங்கள் 'Tweets' விளைவு' முயற்சித்தோம், குறிப்பாக செயல் E- c: உணர்வுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க (பல- label வகைப்பு) எங்கள் முறைமை தொடர்களை முன் செயல்படுத்துவது அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது மற்றும் வார்த்தை நெறிகளை உருவாக்கி ஒலி நீக்க ஒரு ச நாம் உணர்வு குறிப்பிட்ட துளிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டின் மீது இறுதியாக அனுப்புதல் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்டது, ஒரு விளிம்பு வரிகளை பயன்படுத்தும் Our system was evaluated on the Arabic and English datasets provided for the task by the competition organisers, where it ranked 2nd for the Arabic dataset (out of 14 entries) and 12th for the English dataset (out of 35 entries).", 'uz': 'Bu takarda biz SemEval-2018 ga qanday qandaydir, Arab va Ingliz tweetilarning ko\'plab ko\'plab o\'ylab hissiyotlarni fashqaruvchi. Biz Twitterda "Tashqi E-c" uchun "Effektga" jarayotdik: Emotillarni aniqlash (ko\'plab- ketlik darajasini aniqlash). Our method is based on preprocessing the tweets and creating word vectors combined with a self correction step to remove noise.  Biz xuddi foydalanish uchun foydalanamiz. @ info: whatsthis Bizning tizimimizni arab va ingliz tarkibi maʼlumotlar tarkibida qiymat qilindi. Bu muammolar ishga tayyorlangan vazifalar uchun arab maʼlumotlar (14 yordamida) ikkinchi marta va ingliz maʼlumotlari (35 yozuvdan) 12 marta boshlanadi.', 'vi': 'Trong bài viết này chúng tôi xin giới thiệu đóng góp của mình cho SemEvol-208, người phân loại cảm xúc đa nhãn của Twitter. Chúng tôi đã thử tìm tác dụng trong Tweet, đặc biệt là Nhiệm vụ E-c: Việc phát hiện c ảm xúc (phân loại đa nhãn). Phương pháp của chúng tôi dựa trên việc xử lý các tweet và tạo ra các luồng từ cùng với một bước sửa chữa tự động để xóa nhiễu. Chúng tôi cũng tận dụng các ngưỡng cảm xúc cụ thể. Việc đệ trình cuối cùng được chọn dựa trên hiệu suất tốt nhất đạt được, được chọn khi sử dụng một loạt các ngưỡng cửa. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đã được đánh giá trên bộ dữ liệu A Rập và Anh cung cấp cho nhiệm vụ này bởi tổ chức cuộc thi, nơi nó đứng thứ hai cho bộ dữ liệu Ả Rập (trong phần mười bốn) và 12th cho bộ dữ liệu Anh (theo đường 35).', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме приноса си към класификатор за класифициране на многоетикетни емоции на арабски и английски туитове. Опитахме се да "Въздействие в туитове", по-специално задача Е-в: откриване на емоции (класификация с множество етикети). Методът ни се основава на предварителна обработка на туитовете и създаване на вектори на думи, съчетани със стъпка за самокоригиране за премахване на шума. Също така използваме специфични за емоциите прагове. Окончателното представяне беше избрано въз основа на най-доброто постигнато представяне, избрано при използване на диапазон от прагове. Системата ни беше оценена въз основа на арабските и английските набори от данни, предоставени за задачата от организаторите на конкурса, където се класира на второ място за арабския набор от данни (от 14 участия) и на дванадесето място за английския набор от данни (от 35 участия).', 'de': "In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unseren Beitrag zu SemEval-2018 vor, einem Klassifikator zur Klassifizierung von Multi-Label Emotionen arabischer und englischer Tweets. Wir versuchten 'Affect in Tweets', speziell Task E-c: Detecting Emotions (Multi-Label Klassifizierung). Unsere Methode basiert auf der Vorverarbeitung der Tweets und der Erstellung von Wortvektoren kombiniert mit einem Selbstkorrekturschritt zur Entfernung von Rauschen. Wir nutzen auch emotionsspezifische Schwellenwerte. Die endgültige Einreichung wurde auf der Grundlage der besten erreichten Leistung ausgewählt, wobei eine Reihe von Schwellenwerten verwendet wurde. Unser System wurde anhand der arabischen und englischen Datensätze ausgewertet, die von den Wettbewerbsorganisatoren für die Aufgabe bereitgestellt wurden, wobei es für den arabischen Datensatz (von 14-Einträgen) und für den englischen Datensatz (von 35-Einträgen) den zweiten Platz belegte.", 'nl': "In dit artikel presenteren we onze bijdrage aan SemEval-2018, een classificator voor het classificeren van multi-label emoties van Arabische en Engelse tweets. We hebben geprobeerd 'Affect in Tweets', specifiek Taak E-c: Detective Emotions (multi-label classification). Onze methode is gebaseerd op het voorverwerken van de tweets en het creëren van woordvectoren gecombineerd met een zelfcorrectiestap om ruis te verwijderen. Daarnaast maken we gebruik van emotiespecifieke drempels. De uiteindelijke inzending werd geselecteerd op basis van de best bereikte prestaties, geselecteerd met behulp van een reeks drempels. Ons systeem werd geëvalueerd op de Arabische en Engelse datasets die door de wedstrijdorganisatoren voor de taak werden verstrekt, waar het 2e werd voor de Arabische dataset (uit 14-inzendingen) en 12e voor de Engelse dataset (uit 35-inzendingen).", 'da': "I denne artikel præsenterer vi vores bidrag til SemEval-2018, en klassificering af multi-label følelser af arabiske og engelske tweets. Vi forsøgte 'Påfør i tweets', specielt opgave E-c: Detecting Emotions (multi-label klassificering). Vores metode er baseret på forbehandling af tweets og oprettelse af ordvektorer kombineret med et selvkorrektionstrin for at fjerne støj. Vi gør også brug af følelsesspecifikke tærskler. Den endelige indsendelse blev udvalgt på grundlag af den bedste resultat, der blev opnået, og valgt ved anvendelse af en række tærskler. Vores system blev evalueret på grundlag af de arabiske og engelske datasæt, som konkurrencearrangørerne stillede til rådighed for opgaven, hvor det rangerede 2. for det arabiske datasæt (ud af 14 bidrag) og 12. for det engelske datasæt (ud af 35 bidrag).", 'hr': "U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš doprinos semiEval-2018, klasifikaciji za klasifikaciju višeetičnih emocija arapskih i engleskih tweeta. Pokušali smo 'utjecati na Tweets', posebno zadatak E-c: otkrivanje emocija (klasifikacija višeetičkih etiketa). Naša metoda je temeljena na preobrađivanju tweeta i stvaranju vektora riječi kombinirane s korakom samoporave kako bi uklonili buku. Također koristimo posebne praške emocija. Posljednja podnošenja je izabrana na najbolji postignut učinkovit, odabrana kada koristi niz praga. Naš sustav je procijenjen na arapskim i engleskim podacima koji su predložili zadatak organizatorima natjecanja, gdje je postavio 2. za arpski podaci (od 14 ulaza) i 12. za engleski podaci (od 35 ulaza).", 'ko': "본고에서 우리가SemEval-18에 기여한 바를 소개했다.SemEval-18은 아랍어와 영어 트윗의 다중 라벨 감정을 분류하는 분류기이다.우리는'트위터의 감정'을 시도했다. 특히 미션 E-c: 감정을 검출한다(다중 라벨 분류).우리의 방법은 추문에 대한 사전 처리와 창설 어향량을 바탕으로 자체 교정과 결합하여 소음을 제거하는 것이다.우리는 또한 정서에 특정한 한도값을 이용한다.최종 커밋은 최적의 성능에 따라 선택되며 일련의 임계값을 사용할 때 선택됩니다.우리 시스템은 경기 조직자가 이 임무를 위해 제공한 아랍어와 영어 데이터 집합을 평가했는데 그 중에서 아랍어 데이터 집합은 2위(총 14개 항목), 영어 데이터 집합은 12위(총 35개 항목)로 평가되었다.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما مشارکت خود را به SemEval-2018 نشان می دهیم، یک کلاسیک برای تحریک احساسات متنوع نقاشی از tweets عربی و انگلیسی. ما سعی کردیم "تاثیر توئیت"، مخصوصاً Task E-c: شناسایی احساسات (کلی برچسب\u200cها). روش ما بر اساس پیش\u200cپردازی توئیت\u200cها و ایجاد ویکتورهای کلمه\u200cها با یک قدم اصلاح خودمان برای حذف صدا است. ما همچنین از حدود احساسات خاص استفاده می کنیم. تسلیم نهایی بر بهترین کاربردی که به دست آورده شده انتخاب شد، زمانی که از یک مجموعه سطح استفاده می\u200cکند. سیستم ما در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای عربی و انگلیسی برای این کار توسط سازمان\u200cکنندگان رقابت ارزش داده شد، جایی که دوم برای مجموعه داده\u200cهای عربی (از ۱۴ وارد) و دوازدهم برای مجموعه داده\u200cهای انگلیسی (از ۳۵ وارد) رقابت داده شد.', 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii tunatoa mchango wetu wa SemEval-2018, mtangazaji wa kutangaza hisia za lugha nyingi za Kiarabu na Kiingereza. Tulijaribu 'Inaathiri kwenye Twita', hasa Task E-c: Kuchunguza Emotions (usambazaji wa mitandao mengi). Utawala wetu umejikita kwenye kuchunguza twiti hizo na kutengeneza vectori za maneno ikiwa imeunganishwa na hatua ya kujisahihisha ili kuondoa sauti hizo. Pia tunatumia hisia maalum. Ujumbe wa mwisho ulichaguliwa kwa ufanisi mzuri uliofanywa, ulichaguliwa kwa kutumia daraja nyingi. Our system was evaluated on the Arabic and English datasets provided for the task by the competition organisers, where it ranked 2nd for the Arabic dataset (out of 14 entries) and 12th for the English dataset (out of 35 entries).", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz SemEval-2018-nji ýygnagymyzy, arap we iňlisçe tweets duýgularynyň köp etiket duýgularyny sapaklaşdyrmak üçin bir klassifikatçi görkeýäris. Biz Tütlerde etkileşimi denedik, özellikle E-c görevi: Duyglanmalar detektif(multi-label klasifikasyonu). Bizim yöntemimiz tweetleri önden işlemeye ve sesi çıkarmak için kelime vektörleri oluşturmak üzere dayanılır. Biz hem duýgularyň takyk çykyşyny ulanýarys. Iň gowy netijesi başarmak üçin soňky gönderme saýlandy. Biziň sistemamyz arabça we iňlisçe veri setirlerinde ýaryşyk çykyşçylar tarapyndan beren zady üçin deňlendirildi. Bu ýerler Arapça veri setirleriniň 2-nji derejesi (14-nji girişden) we 12-nji diňlis veri setirleriniň (35 girişden çift).', 'sq': "Në këtë letër ne paraqesim kontributin tonë në SemEval-2018, një klasifikues për klasifikimin e emocioneve me shumë etiketa të tweeteve arabe dhe angleze. Ne u munduam 'Affet in Tweets', specifikisht Task E-c: Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification). Metoda jonë bazohet në përprocesimin e tweeteve dhe krijimin e vektorëve të fjalëve të kombinuar me një hap të vetëkorrektimit për të hequr zhurmën. Ne gjithashtu përdorim prag specifik të emocioneve. Paraqitja përfundimtare u zgjodh me rezultatin më të mirë të arritur, zgjedhur kur përdoret një gamë pragjesh. Sistemi ynë u vlerësua në grupet e të dhënave arabe dhe angleze të ofruara për detyrën nga organizatorët e konkurrencës, ku u rendit i dyti për grupin e të dhënave arabe (nga 14 hyrje) dhe i dyti për grupin e të dhënave angleze (nga 35 hyrje).", 'af': "In hierdie papier voorsien ons bydraag aan SemEval-2018, 'n klassifiseerder vir klassifisering van multi-label emosies van Arabiese en Engelske tweets. Ons probeer 'Afteken in Tweets', spesifieke Opdrag E- c: Opsoek Emotisies (multi- label klasifikasie). Ons metode is gebaseer op voorafverwerking van die tweets en skep woord vektores gekombineer met 'n selfkorreksie stap om ruis te verwyder. Ons gebruik ook van emosie spesifieke drukkels. Die eindelike onderdrag is gekose op die beste prestasie wat bereik is, gekose wanneer gebruik word 'n omvang van driehoeke. Ons stelsel is geevalueer op die Arabse en Engelse datastelle wat vir die taak verskaf word deur die samekorganiseerdes, waar dit 2 rangeer vir die Arabse datastel (uit 14 inskrywings) en 12 vir die Engelse datastel (uit 35 inskrywings).", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የዐረብኛ እና እንግሊዘኛ ትዊተቶችን ለመለፍ የሚደረገውን አዋጅ ለSemEval-2018 እና ለጋዜጠኛ ታሪክ አዋጅ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በTweets ውስጥ ጥሩ ነው፣ በተለይም ስራ E-c: Emotions ማግኘት (multi-label classification) ሞክረናል፡፡ የንግግር መንገዳችን በትዊተኞቹን ለመቀናቀል እና የቃላት vectors መፍጠር ድምፅን ለማስወገድ በራሱ አስተካክሎ እርምጃን በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ እውቀት የተለየ መሆኑን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ The final submission was selected upon the best performance achieved, selected when using a range of thresholds.  የዓረብኛ እና የኢንጂልኛ ዳታተሮችን ለሥርዓት ሰርዓት የተደረገውን የዓረብኛ እና የኢንጂልኛ ዳታተር ሰርቨርስቲ ተካክሎአል፡፡', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সেমভাল-২০১৮-এ আমাদের অবদান উপস্থাপন করছি, যিনি আরবী এবং ইংরেজী টুইটের অনুভূতিকে বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য এক বিশ্লেষক। আমরা টুইটারে প্রভাব ফেলার চেষ্টা করেছি। বিশেষ করে কাজ ই-সি: ইমুটিশন সন্ধান করা হচ্ছে (বহুল-লেবেল ক্লাসাফেশন)। Our method is based on preprocessing the tweets and creating word vectors combined with a self correction step to remove noise.  We also make use of emotion specific thresholds.  সর্বোচ্চ প্রদর্শনের মধ্যে শেষ প্রতিক্রিয়া নির্বাচিত হয়েছে, যেখানে বেছে নেওয়া হয়েছে সেখানে বেছে নিয়েছে  প্রতিযোগিতাদের কর্মসূচীর জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেম আরবী এবং ইংরেজী ডাটাসেটে মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে, যেখানে এটি আরবী ডাটাসেটের দ্বিতীয় ভাগ (১৪ এন্ট্রি থেক', 'bs': "U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš doprinos semiEval-2018, klasifikaciji za klasifikaciju višeetičnih emocija arapskih i engleskih tweeta. Pokušali smo 'utjecati na Tweets', posebno zadatak E-c: otkrivanje emocija (klasifikacija multietiketa). Naša metoda je bazirana na preobrazovanju tweeta i stvaranju vektora riječi kombinirane sa korakom samooprave kako bi uklonili buku. Također koristimo posebne praške emocija. Posljednji podatak je izabran na najbolji postignut uspjeh, odabran kada koristi niz praga. Naš sistem je procijenjen na arapskim i engleskim podacima koji su predložili zadatak organizatorima natjecanja, gdje je određen 2. redak za komplet arapskih podataka (od 14 ulaza) i 12. za komplet engleskih podataka (od 35 ulaza).", 'az': 'Bu kağıtda biz halımızı SemEval-2018-ə, ərəb və İngilizə tweetlərinin çoxlu etiketli duygularını təsdiqləmək üçün klassifikat göstəririk. Biz "Tweets içində müxtəlif Etkinlik" təminatı etdik, özlərinə görə Task E-c: Emotikləri keşif etdik (çoxlu etiket klasifikasyonu). Bizim metodumuz twetlərin əvvəlcə işlədilməsi və səsini silmək üçün özünün düzəltmə adımları ilə birlikdə söz vektörlərini yaratmağa dayandırır. Biz həmçinin hisslərin məxluqatını istifadə edirik. Ən yaxşı performans istifadə etdikdə son təklif seçildi. Bizim sistemimiz ərəbcə və İngilizce veri qurğuları ilə müharibə organizatorların müharibəsində təmin edilmiş, ərəbcə veri qurğuları (14 daxilindən) və İngilizce veri qurğuları (35 daxilindən) üçün 2-ci dərəcə verildi.', 'id': "In this paper we present our contribution to SemEval-2018, a classifier for classifying multi-label emotions of Arabic and English tweets.  Kami mencoba 'Affect in Tweets', khususnya Task E-c: Detektif Emotions (klasifikasi multi-label). Our method is based on preprocessing the tweets and creating word vectors combined with a self correction step to remove noise.  We also make use of emotion specific thresholds.  Pengiriman akhir dipilih pada prestasi terbaik yang dicapai, dipilih ketika menggunakan jangkauan ambang. Our system was evaluated on the Arabic and English datasets provided for the task by the competition organisers, where it ranked 2nd for the Arabic dataset (out of 14 entries) and 12th for the English dataset (out of 35 entries).", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր ներդրումը ՍեմԷվալ 2018 թվականին, որը դասակարգում է արաբերական և անգլերենի թվիթերի բազմաթիվ էմոցիաների դասակարգումը: Մենք փորձեցինք «Անշանակություն թվիթերում», հատկապես «Անշանակություն թվիթերում», հատկապես «Անշանակություն E-c»-ի խնդիրը՝ զգացմունքներ հայտնաբերելը: Մեր մեթոդը հիմնված է թվիթերի նախապրոցեսի վրա և բառերի վեկտորների ստեղծման վրա, համադրված ինքնաուղղության քայլի հետ աղմուկի հեռացնելու համար: Մենք նաև օգտագործում ենք զգացմունքների կոնկրետ խոչընդոտներ: The final submission was selected upon the best performance achieved, selected when using a range of thresholds.  Our system was evaluated on the Arabic and English datasets provided for the task by the competition organisers, where it ranked 2nd for the Arabic dataset (out of 14 entries) and 12th for the English dataset (out of 35 entries).', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme náš příspěvek k SemEval-2018, klasifikátoru pro klasifikaci multi-label emocí arabských a anglických tweetů. Pokusili jsme se o "Affect in Tweets", konkrétně Úkol E-c: Detekce emocí (multi-label klasifikace). Naše metoda je založena na předzpracování tweetů a vytváření slovních vektorů v kombinaci s krokem vlastní korekce k odstranění šumu. Využíváme také prahové hodnoty specifické pro emoce. Konečné předložení bylo vybráno na základě nejlepšího dosaženého výkonu, vybráno při použití rozsahu prahových hodnot. Náš systém byl vyhodnocen na arabských a anglických datových sadách poskytnutých pro daný úkol organizátory soutěže, kde byl druhý pro arabský datový set (ze čtrnácti příspěvků) a dvanáctý pro anglický datový set (ze 35 příspěvků).', 'fi': "Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme panoksemme SemEval-2018:een, joka on luokiteltu arabian ja englannin twiittien monimerkkisten tunteiden luokitteluun. Yritimme 'Affect in Tweets', erityisesti Tehtävä E-c: Tunteiden havaitseminen (moniniminen luokitus). Menetelmämme perustuu tweettien esikäsittelyyn ja sanavektorien luomiseen yhdistettynä itsekorjausvaiheeseen kohinan poistamiseksi. Käytämme myös tunnekohtaisia kynnysarvoja. Lopullinen hakemus valittiin parhaan saavutetun suorituskyvyn perusteella, joka valittiin käyttämällä raja-arvoja. Järjestelmämme arvioitiin kilpailunjärjestäjien tehtävään toimittamien arabian ja englannin aineistojen perusteella, joissa se sijoittui 2. sijalle arabian aineistossa (14 artikkelista) ja 12. sijalle englanninkielisessä aineistossa (35 artikkelista).", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame oma panust SemEval-2018-sse, mis on klassifitseerija araabia ja inglise säutsude mitmemärgiseliste emotsioonide klassifitseerimiseks. Me proovisime "Affect in Tweets", täpsemalt ülesannet E-c: Tundete tuvastamine (mitme sildiga klassifikatsioon). Meie meetod põhineb säutsude eeltöötlusel ja sõnavaktorite loomisel koos iseparandusetapiga müra eemaldamiseks. Me kasutame ka emotsioonide spetsiifilisi piirmäärasid. Lõplik esitus valiti parima saavutatud tulemuse põhjal, mis valiti mitmesuguste piirmäärade kasutamisel. Meie süsteemi hinnati võistluse korraldajate poolt antud araabia ja inglise andmekogumite põhjal, kus ta asus araabia andmekogumis teisel kohal (14 osalusest) ja inglise andmekogumis kaheteistkümnendal kohal (35 osalusest).', 'ca': 'En aquest article presentem la nostra contribució a SemEval-2018, un classificador per classificar emocions multietiquetades de tweets àrabs i anglès. Vam intentar "Afectar en Tweets", específicament la tasca E-c: Detectar emocions. El nostre mètode es basa en preparar els tweets i crear vectors de paraules combinats amb un pas d\'autocorrecció per eliminar el soroll. We also make use of emotion specific thresholds.  The final submission was selected upon the best performance achieved, selected when using a range of thresholds.  Our system was evaluated on the Arabic and English datasets provided for the task by the competition organisers, where it ranked 2nd for the Arabic dataset (out of 14 entries) and 12th for the English dataset (out of 35 entries).', 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki, kita nyumbang nggawe lanjut kanggo semi-inval-2013, kelas kanggo kelas supayano karo layakno sing bintang karo tuwit sing arap karo ingkang. Awakdaypung daemony Genjer-tool Awak dhéwé éntuk kesempatan kanggo nggawe kesempatan. Kowé nggunian nggo ngwalih luwih apik ing gawe operas nggawe diunting winih Sistem dhéwé wis ditambahak kanggo dataset arap lan ingês sing ngewehku nggawe kanggo ngubah Organiser sing atipêr, wong dhéwé wis arep 2é kanggo dataset arap (sing katêpakan 14) lan 12 uwong kanggo dataset ingês', 'he': "בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים את התרומה שלנו לסימוול-2018, קלאסיפור להקלאס רגשות multi-label של טוויטים ערביים ואנגליים. We attempted 'Affect in Tweets', specifically Task E-c: Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification).  השיטה שלנו מבוססת על התמודדות הטוויטים ויוצרים ווקטורים מילים שילובים עם צעד תיקון עצמי כדי להסיר רעש. אנחנו גם משתמשים בגבלים מסוימים לרגשות. ההעברה הסופית נבחרה בהופעה הטובה ביותר, נבחרה כשהשתמשת בטווח של גבולות. המערכת שלנו הוערכה על קבוצת הנתונים הערבית והאנגלית שסיפקו למשימה על ידי מארגני התחרות, שם היא הגיעה לשנייה עבור קבוצת הנתונים הערבית (מתוך 14 קבוצות) ו-12 עבור קבוצת הנתונים האנגלית (מתוך 35 קבוצות).", 'ha': 'Ga wannan takardan da Muke gauraya mataimakanmu zuwa SemEl-2018, mai fassari ga fassarar hisãbi masu yawa na littafin Larabci da Ingiriya. @ info: whatsthis Taimakonmu na kan ka sami ta kangara na kafiriyar Twitter kuma ya sami shiryoyi na maganar, da kuma ya sami wata hanyor gyare-gyare zuwa ta sauti. Kayya da Muke amfani da filin hisi masu ƙayyade. @ info: whatsthis An evaluce system a kan data na Larabci da Ingiriya da aka ba wa aikin mai ƙidãya, a inda, ta saurara shi na rubutu na danne na Larabci (daga 14 entries) da na rubutu wa data na Ingiriya (daga 35 entries).', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo prispevek k SemEval-2018, klasifikatorju za razvrščanje večoznaknih čustev arabskih in angleških tweetov. Poskušali smo "Affect in Tweets", še posebej nalogo E-c: Zaznavanje čustev (razvrstitev z več oznakami). Naša metoda temelji na predobdelavi tweetov in ustvarjanju besednih vektorjev v kombinaciji s korakom samopopravka za odstranitev hrupa. Uporabljamo tudi mejne vrednosti za čustva. Končna predložitev je bila izbrana po najboljši doseženi uspešnosti, izbrana ob uporabi različnih pragov. Naš sistem je bil ocenjen na podlagi arabskih in angleških naborov podatkov, ki so jih za nalogo zagotovili organizatorji tekmovanja, kjer je bil na 2. mestu za arabski nabor podatkov (od 14 prijav) in 12. mestu za angleški nabor podatkov (od 35 prijav).', 'bo': "འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐབས་SemEval-2018་ལ། ང་ཚོས་Tweets's 'Affect in Tweets'་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་ནི་Task E-c:Detecting Emotions (multi-label classification). ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་ tweets་ཚིག་སྔ་གོང་ལས་སྒྲུབ་ཕྱིར་བཞིན་བྱེད་བཞིན་པའམ། རང་ཉིད་བདེ་འཐབ་གྱི་གོང་འཕྲད་ལས ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་སེམས་འཚོལ་དམིགས་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པ་ཡིན། མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དཀའ་རིས་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྐབས་བདམས་ཟིན་པ ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་ནི་ཨ་རབ་དང་ཨིན་རིའི་གནད་སྡུད་གྱི་ནང་དུ་དབུལ་སྤྱོད་པ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་ཡོད།"}
{'en': 'Yuan at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'ar': 'Yuan في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: تغريدات على توقع كثافة الانفعالات باستخدام Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'es': 'Yuan en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Predicción de la intensidad de la emoción de los tuits utilizando la red', 'pt': 'Yuan no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Tweets Previsão de Intensidade de Emoção usando Rede Neural Recorrente de Ensemble', 'fr': "Yuan à SemEval-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Tweets Prédiction de l'intensité des émotions à l'aide du réseau de neurones", 'ja': 'Yuan at SemEval -2018 Task 1: Ensemble Recurrent Neural Networkを使用した感情の強さ予測のツイート', 'ru': 'Юань на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Твиты предсказания интенсивности эмоций с использованием ансамбля рекуррентной нейронной сети', 'zh': '袁在SemEval-2018务1:以集成递归神经网络推文情度', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर युआन: Tweets भावना तीव्रता भविष्यवाणी Ensemble आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर', 'ga': 'Yuan ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Tweets Tuar Déine Mothúcháin ag baint úsáide as Líonra Néarach Athfhillteach Ensemble', 'hu': 'Yuan a SemEval-2018 feladat 1: Tweets Érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzés az Ensemble ismétlődő ideghálózatával', 'ka': 'Yuan SemEval-2018 დავალება 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Τουίτερ Πρόγνωση Έντασης Συναίσθησης χρησιμοποιώντας Επαναλαμβανόμενο Νευρικό Δίκτυο Ενσωμάτων', 'it': "Yuan a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Previsione dell'intensità emotiva utilizzando la rete neurale ricorrente Ensemble", 'lt': 'Yuan per 2018 m. pusmetį 1 užduotis: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'kk': 'Yuan at semiEval- 2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Repeat Neural Network', 'mk': 'Yuan at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലി', 'no': 'Yuan ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'ms': 'Yuan pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction menggunakan Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'mt': 'Yuan f’SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'pl': 'Yuan w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Tweety prognozowanie intensywności emocji przy użyciu zespołu Recurrent Neuroral Network', 'mn': 'Yuan at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2018 Yuan 1: Tweets Digta Fiiritaanka Isticmaalka Internetka Neurada ee soo socda', 'ro': 'Yuan la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Tweets Predicția Intensității Emoției folosind Rețeaua Neurală Recurentă a Ansamblului', 'si': 'Yuan at HalfEvel-2018 Job 1: Tweets Emotion Intensty Precdiction', 'sr': 'Yuan na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction koristeći uključenu ponovnu Neuralnu mrežu', 'ta': 'Я«џЯ»єЯ««Я»ЇEval- 2018 Я«фЯ«БЯ«┐', 'ur': 'یوان سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں: ٹویٹ ایموٹنسیٹ انٹنسیٹ پردیکت', 'sv': 'Yuan på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction med Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'uz': 'Yuan at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'vi': 'Viên Liệt tại SemEvl-208 Task 1: non xem thử kích thích kích thích đa dạng bằng mạng thần kinh phục hồi xuyên quy.', 'bg': 'Юан в Задача 1: Прогнозиране на интензивността на емоциите с помощта на ансамбъл повтаряща се неврална мрежа', 'da': 'Yuan på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Tweets Følelsesintensitetsforudsigelse ved hjælp af Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'hr': 'Yuan na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Tweets Intensity Predviđanje emocija koristeći uključenu ponovnu neuronu mrežu', 'id': 'Yuan di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction menggunakan Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'ko': '원재SemEval-2018 미션1: 집적귀속신경망으로 트위터 정서강도 예측', 'nl': 'Yuan bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Tweets Emotie Intensiteit voorspelling met behulp van Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'de': 'Yuan bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Tweets Emotionsintensit瓣tsvorhersage mit Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'sw': 'Yuan katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Twita Utawala wa Uhamiaji wa Tamko kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea', 'tr': 'Yuan at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'Yuan at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'az': 'Yuan at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'sq': 'Yuan në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'bs': 'Yuan na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction koristeći uključenu ponovnu Neuralnu mrežu', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ইয়ুয়ান ১: পুনরায় বার্তা নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে টুইটারের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতা প্রেরণ', 'hy': "Yuan-ը 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի առաջին հանձնարարությունում' Tweet-ում է զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության կանխատեսումը, օգտագործելով անընդհատ կրկնվող նյարդային ցանց", 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 1: Twitter Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'ca': 'Yuan a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction Using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'cs': 'Yuan na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Tweetuje predikci emoční intenzity pomocí souborové recidivní neuronové sítě', 'fi': 'Yuan SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Ennuste käyttäen Ensemble Toistuvaa hermoverkostoa', 'et': 'Yuan SemEval-2018 ülesanne 1: tweets emotsioonide intensiivsuse prognoosimine ansambli korduva neurovõrgu abil', 'jv': 'Yuan nang semebal-2008 task 1: Tuts emutation Intensity predikion nggambar', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'Yuan at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network', 'sk': 'Yuan na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Napoved intenzivnosti čustev z uporabo Ensemble ponavljajoče se živčne mreže', 'bo': 'Yuan at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Tweets Emotion Intensity Prediction using Ensemble Recurrent Neural Network'}
{'en': 'We perform the LSTM and BiLSTM model for the emotion intensity prediction. We only join the third subtask in Task 1 : Affect in Tweets. Our system rank 6th among all the teams.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتنفيذ نموذج LSTM و BiLSTM لتنبؤ شدة الانفعال. ننضم فقط إلى المهمة الفرعية الثالثة في المهمة 1: التأثير في التغريدات. يحتل نظامنا المرتبة السادسة بين جميع الفرق.', 'fr': "Nous réalisons le modèle LSTM et BilsTM pour la prédiction de l'intensité des émotions. Nous rejoignons uniquement la troisième sous-tâche de la Tâche 1\xa0: Affecter dans les Tweets. Notre système se classe au 6e rang parmi toutes les équipes.", 'es': 'Realizamos el modelo LSTM y BilsTM para la predicción de la intensidad de las emociones. Solo nos unimos a la tercera subtarea de la Tarea 1: Efecto en los Tweets. Nuestro sistema ocupa el sexto lugar entre todos los equipos.', 'pt': 'Realizamos o modelo LSTM e BiLSTM para a previsão da intensidade da emoção. Só entramos na terceira subtarefa na Tarefa 1: Afetar nos Tweets. Nosso sistema ocupa o 6º lugar entre todas as equipes.', 'ja': '感情強度予測のためのLSTMおよびBiLSTMモデルを実行します。タスク1:ツイートに影響を与える3つ目のサブタスクにのみ参加します。私たちのシステムは、すべてのチームの中で6位です。', 'zh': '我行LSTMBiLSTM,我行情度。 但入务 1:推文中第三子。 凡诸团队中排名第6。', 'ru': 'Мы выполняем модель LSTM и BiLSTM для прогнозирования интенсивности эмоций. Мы присоединяемся только к третьей подзадаче в Задаче 1:Влияние на твиты. Наша система занимает 6-е место среди всех команд.', 'hi': 'हम भावना तीव्रता भविष्यवाणी के लिए LSTM और BiLSTM मॉडल प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हम केवल कार्य 1 में तीसरे उप-कार्य में शामिल होते हैं: ट्वीट ्स में प्रभावित होते हैं. हमारा सिस्टम सभी टीमों के बीच 6 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ga': 'Déanaimid an tsamhail LSTM agus BiLSTM chun déine na mothúchán a thuar. Ní ghlacaimid ach leis an tríú fothasc i dTasc 1: Tionchar in Tweets. Tá ár gcóras sa 6ú háit i measc na bhfoirne ar fad.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ LSTM და BiLSTM მოდელს ემოციონის ინტენსტივის წარმოდგენისთვის. ჩვენ მხოლოდ სამუშაო სამუშაო კითხვაში დავწყებთ 1-ში:შემდეგ Tweets-ში. ჟთჟრვმარა ნთ ვ 6-ა მვზეს გჟთფკთრვ რთმთ.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzéséhez LSTM és BiLSTM modellt végezzük. Csak a harmadik részfeladathoz csatlakozunk az 1. feladat: hatás a tweetekben. A rendszerünk hatodik helyen áll az összes csapat közül.', 'el': 'Εκτελούμε το μοντέλο για την πρόβλεψη έντασης συναισθημάτων. Συμμετέχουμε μόνο στην τρίτη δευτερεύουσα ερώτηση στην εργασία 1:Επίδραση στα tweets. Το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται 6η από όλες τις ομάδες.', 'it': "Eseguiamo il modello LSTM e BiLSTM per la previsione dell'intensità emotiva. Ci uniamo solo alla terza sottomissione in Task 1:Affect in Tweets. Il nostro sistema si classifica sesto tra tutte le squadre.", 'kk': 'Эмоциялық қанықтығын бақылау үшін LSTM және BiLSTM үлгісін орындаймыз. Біз тек 1- тапсырманың үшінші суретіне қатынаймыз: Твиттердің әсері. Біздің жүйеміз барлық топтардың 6-ші ретінде.', 'lt': 'Mes atliekame LSTM ir BiLSTM model į emocijos intensyvumo prognozavimui. Mes prisijungiame tik prie trečio paklausimo 1 užduotyje:Poveikis Tweetuose. Mūsų sistema yra šešta iš visų komandų.', 'mk': 'Го изведуваме моделот на ЛСТМ и БиЛСТМ за предвидување на емоционалниот интензитет. We only join the third subtask in Task 1:Affect in Tweets.  Нашиот систем е на шесто место меѓу сите тимови.', 'ms': 'Kami melakukan model LSTM dan BiLSTM untuk ramalan intensiti emosi. Kami hanya bergabung dengan subtitle ketiga dalam Tugas 1:Kesan dalam Tweets. Sistem kita berturut-turut ke-6 di antara semua pasukan.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിംസിന്റെയും ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റിം മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. വികാരത്തിന്റെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d  ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നാമത്തെ ഉപാധിയില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം എല്ലാ ടീമുകളുടെയും കൂട്ടത്തിലും ആറാമതാണ്.', 'mt': 'Aħna nagħmlu l-mudell LSTM u BiLSTM għat-tbassir tal-intensità emozzjonali. Aħna ngħaqdu mat-tielet sottomistoqsija biss fil-Kompitu 1:Affett fit-Tweets. Is-sistema tagħna tikklassifika s-sitt fost it-timijiet kollha.', 'mn': 'Бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчтэй таамаглах LSTM болон BiLSTM загварыг хийдэг. Бид зөвхөн 1-р ажлын 3-р суудалгаанд холбогдож байна. Бидний систем бүх багийн 6-р багтай.', 'no': 'Vi utfører LSTM og BiLSTM-modellen for forhåndsvising av emosjonsintensitet. Vi er berre med den tredje underspørjinga i oppgåve 1: Etter tweet. Systemet vårt ranker 6. mellom alle gruppene.', 'pl': 'Wykonujemy model LSTM i BiLSTM do przewidywania intensywności emocji. Dołączamy tylko do trzeciego podzadania w Zadaniu 1:Efekt w Tweetach. Nasz system jest szósty wśród wszystkich drużyn.', 'ro': 'Realizăm modelul LSTM și BiLSTM pentru predicția intensității emoționale. Ne alăturăm doar celei de-a treia subactivități din Activitatea 1: Afect în Tweets. Sistemul nostru se clasează pe locul 6 printre toate echipele.', 'si': 'අපි LSTM සහ BiLSTM නිර්මාණය කරනවා හැඟීමත් අවශ්\u200dයාවට. අපි වෙනුවෙන් තුන්වෙනි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි වෙනුවෙන් විතරයි ට්විට් වල තියෙන්නේ. අපේ පද්ධතිය සේරම කණ්ඩායම් අතර 6යි.', 'sr': 'Izvodimo LSTM i BiLSTM model za predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete. Pridružimo se samo trećem podpitanju u zadatku 1: Afekt na Tweets. Naš sistem je 6. red među svim timovima.', 'so': 'Tusaalada LSTM iyo BiLSTM waxaynu sameynaa wax la sii sheego dareenka. Shaqada saddexaad oo kaliya waxaynu ku biireynaa Twitteet:Affect. nidaamkayaga waxay ka mid yihiin 6aad kooxda oo dhan.', 'sv': 'Vi utför LSTM- och BiLSTM-modellen för prediktion av känslointensitet. Vi går bara med i den tredje underuppgiften i Uppgift 1:Påverkan i Tweets. Vårt system rankas 6:e bland alla lag.', 'ta': 'நாம் LSTM மற்றும் பில்எஸ்டிஎம் மாதிரியை செய்து உணர்வு கூட்டத்திற்கான முன்வாக்கியம். மூன்றாவது துணை பணியில் மட்டும் நாம் சேர்ந்து கொள்கிறோம் தேவை 1: தாக்கத்தில். எங்கள் அமைப்பு எல்லா குழுக்களிலும் 6வது தரம்.', 'ur': 'ہم LSTM اور BiLSTM موڈل کو احساسات مضبوط پیش بینی کے لئے عمل کرتے ہیں. ہم صرف تیسرے سٹ پرس میں ملتے ہیں تاکہ 1:ٹویٹ میں اثر ہے. ہماری سیستم تمام تیموں میں چھٹا درجہ ہے.', 'uz': 'Biz hissiyotning eng kuchi cheksizligi uchun LSTM va BiLSTM modelini bajaramiz. Biz faqat Twitterda 1: Effektda uchinchi vazifani birlashtiramiz. Bizning tizimmiz hamma guruhlardagi 6 ta darajada.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi thực hiện mô hình LSD và BiLSTM để dự đoán độ mạnh cảm xúc. Chúng ta chỉ tham gia phần thứ ba trong Nhiệm vụ 1:Xác nhận trong Tweet. Hệ thống chúng ta đứng thứ sáu trong các đội.', 'bg': 'Изпълняваме модела за прогнозиране на интензивността на емоциите. Присъединяваме се само към третата подзадача в Задача 1: Въздействие в туитове. Системата ни се нарежда на шесто място сред всички отбори.', 'hr': 'Izvodimo LSTM i BiLSTM model za predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete. Pridružimo se samo trećem podpitanju u zadatku 1:Afekt na Tweets. Naš sustav je 6. red među svim timovima.', 'da': 'Vi udfører LSTM og BiLSTM modellen til forudsigelse af følelsesintensitet. Vi slutter os kun til den tredje underopgave i Opgave 1: Påvirkning i tweets. Vores system rangerer 6. blandt alle holdene.', 'nl': 'We voeren het LSTM- en BiLSTM-model uit voor de voorspelling van emotie-intensiteit. We nemen alleen deel aan de derde subtaak in Taak 1:Effect in Tweets. Ons systeem staat 6e onder alle teams.', 'de': 'Zur Vorhersage der Emotionsintensität führen wir das LSTM- und BiLSTM-Modell durch. Wir treten nur der dritten Teilaufgabe in Aufgabe 1:Effekt in Tweets bei. Unser System belegt den sechsten Platz unter allen Teams.', 'id': 'Kami melakukan model LSTM dan BiLSTM untuk prediksi intensitas emosi. Kami hanya bergabung dengan subtask ketiga dalam Tugas 1:Affect dalam Tweets. Sistem kita tingkat enam diantara semua tim.', 'ko': '우리는 LSTM과 BilSTM 모델을 이용하여 정서 강도 예측을 한다.우리는 퀘스트 1의 세 번째 하위 퀘스트만 가입합니다: 추문에 영향을 미칩니다.우리 시스템은 모든 팀 중 6위에 랭크되어 있다.', 'fa': 'ما مدل LSTM و BiLSTM را برای پیش بینی شدت احساسات انجام می دهیم. ما فقط به سومین سوال در کار ۱ پیوسته می\u200cشویم. سیستم ما در میان تمام تیم\u200cها درجه ششمین است.', 'af': 'Ons uitvoer die LSTM en BiLSTM model vir die emosie intensiteit voorskou. Ons sluit slegs by die derde subtvraag in Taak 1: Afteken in Tweets. Ons stelsel rank 6de onder al die teams.', 'tr': 'Biz LSTM we BiLSTM nusgyny duýgulandyrylygy üçin çykýarys. Biz diňe 1-nji Görevde üçünji astsorag bilen goşulýarys. Biziň sistemamyz hemme topardan 6-nji dereje.', 'hy': 'Մենք կատարում ենք LSMT-ը և ԲիLSMT-ը զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության կանխատեսման համար: Մենք միանում ենք միայն առաջին հանձնարարության երրորդ ենթահարցին.Աշխատություն թվիթերում: Մեր համակարգը 6-րդ դասակարգվում է բոլոր թիմերի մեջ:', 'sq': 'We perform the LSTM and BiLSTM model for the emotion intensity prediction.  Ne bashkohemi vetëm me nënpyetjen e tretë në detyrën 1:Afekt në Tweets. Sistemi ynë renditet i gjashti midis të gjitha ekipave.', 'sw': 'Tunafanya mtindo wa LSTM na BiLSTM kwa utabiri wa kiwango cha hisia. We only join the third subtask in Task 1:Affect in Tweets.  Mfumo wetu una nafasi ya 6 kati ya timu zote.', 'am': 'እና ልSTM እና ቢልSTM ምሳሌ ለስብሰባው ውጤት ለመፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሁለተኛው ትዊተሮች ውስጥ በሦስተኛው ደብዳቤ ስራ ብቻ እናገባለን፡፡ Our system rank 6th among all the teams.', 'bn': 'We perform the LSTM and BiLSTM model for the emotion intensity prediction.  আমরা শুধুমাত্র তৃতীয় সাবক্ষেত্রে টুইটারে যোগ দিচ্ছি। আমাদের সিস্টেম সকল দলের মধ্যে ৬ সংখ্যা।', 'az': 'Biz LSTM və BiLSTM modelini duygusal şiddətli tədbirlə etdik. Biz ancaq 1-ci işdə üçüncü subtask ə katılırıq: Tövidlərdə müxtəlif. Sistemimiz bütün takımlar arasında 6-ci dərəcə.', 'bs': 'Izvodimo LSTM i BiLSTM model za predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete. Pridružimo se samo trećem podpitanju u zadatku 1: Afekt na Tweets. Naš sistem je 6. red među svim timovima.', 'cs': 'Provádíme LSTM a BiLSTM model pro predikci intenzity emocí. Připojujeme se pouze k třetímu podúkolu v Úkolu 1:Efekt ve Tweetech. Náš systém má šesté místo mezi všemi týmy.', 'et': 'Me teostame emotsioonide intensiivsuse prognoosimiseks LSTM ja BiLSTM mudelit. Me liitume ainult kolmanda alamülesandega ülesandes 1: mõju tweetides. Meie süsteem on kõigi meeskondade seas 6. kohal.', 'ca': "Fem el model LSTM i BiLSTM per a predir l'intensitat emocional. Només ens unim a la tercera subterrània de la tasca 1:Afectar en Tweets. El nostre sistema es classe sexta entre tots els equips.", 'fi': 'Suoritamme LSTM- ja BiLSTM-mallin tunteiden voimakkuuden ennustamiseen. Liitymme vain kolmanteen alatehtävään Task 1:Affect in Tweets. Järjestelmämme sijoittuu kuudenneksi kaikkien joukkueiden joukossa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé iso nggawe modèl LTT karo BiLTT kanggo uréndah kesempatan langgar duwé Awak dhéwé menyang kamuh tanggal telu kanggo Mbak 1:AfEffect nang Tuet. Sistem awak dhéwé sing sesuk wae ning sekang bandang.', 'sk': 'Za napoved intenzivnosti čustev izvajamo model LSTM in BiLSTM. Pridružimo se le tretji podnalogi v nalogi 1: Vpliv v tweets. Naš sistem se uvršča na 6. mesto med vsemi ekipami.', 'ha': "Muna cika misalin LSM da BiLSM zuwa ga abin da ke faɗa na hisani. Tuna haɗi kawai da na uku a cikin aikin 1:Affect in Twitter. Systeminmu na ɗaukaka daraja 6 daga dukkan jama'a.", 'he': 'אנחנו מבצעים את מודל LSTM ובייLSTM לחזוי אינטנסיבות הרגשות. אנחנו מצטרפים רק לתת השאלה השלישית במשימה 1: המערכת שלנו מדרגה 6 בין כל הקבוצות.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སེམས་ཚོར་མཐུན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་LSTM་དང་BiLSTM་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་་པོ་དུས་མཚམས་གསུམ་པ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཚོགས་ཁང་ཚང་མར་གྱི་གྲངས་གསུམ་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Amobee at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'ar': 'Amobee في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: شبكة GRU العصبية مع آلية اهتمام CNN لتصنيف المشاعر', 'fr': "Amobee au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Réseau de neurones GRU avec un mécanisme d'attention CNN pour la classification des sentiments", 'pt': 'Amobee na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Rede Neural GRU com Mecanismo de Atenção CNN para Classificação de Sentimentos', 'es': 'Amobee en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Red Neural GRU con un mecanismo de atención de CNN para la clasificación de sentimientos', 'ja': 'Amobee at SemEval -2018タスク1 ：センチメント分類のためのCNNアテンションメカニズムを備えたGRUニューラルネットワーク', 'zh': 'Amobee在SemEval-2018务1:有CNN机之GRU神经网络,用于情类', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर Amobee: भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए सीएनएन ध्यान तंत्र के साथ GRU तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Amobee на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Нейронная сеть GRU с механизмом внимания CNN для классификации чувств', 'ga': 'Amobee ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Líonra Néarach GRU le Meicníocht Airde CNN le haghaidh Aicmiú Meonchain', 'ka': 'Amobee at SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Νευρικό Δίκτυο με μηχανισμό προσοχής για την ταξινόμηση των συναισθημάτων', 'hu': 'Amobee a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: GRU Neurális Hálózat CNN figyelmeztető mechanizmussal az érzelmek osztályozására', 'kk': 'Amobee at semiEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'it': 'Amobee al SemEval-2018 Task 1: Rete Neurale GRU con un meccanismo di attenzione CNN per la classificazione dei sentimenti', 'lt': 'Amobee SemEval-2018 1 užduotis: GRU nervinis tinklas su CNN dėmesio klasifikavimo mechanizmu', 'mk': 'Amobee на SemEval-2018 задача 1: ГрУ неврална мрежа со механизам за внимание на CNN за класификација на чувствата', 'ms': 'Amobee di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Rangkaian Neural GRU dengan Mekanisme Perhatian CNN untuk Pengklasifikasi Sentiment', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലി', 'mt': 'L-Amobee f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Netwerk Newrali GRU b’Mekkaniżmu ta’ Attenzjoni CNN għall-Klassifikazzjoni tas-Sentiment', 'mn': 'Amobee at SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'sr': 'Amobee na semiEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neuralna mreža sa CNN-om mehanizam pažnje za sentimentnu klasifikaciju', 'no': 'Amobee at semiEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'pl': 'Amobee w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Sieć neuronowa GRU z mechanizmem uwagi CNN dla klasyfikacji sentymentów', 'ro': 'Amobee la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Rețeaua Neurală GRU cu Mecanism de Atenție CNN pentru Clasificarea Sentimentelor', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் அமோபி 1: ஜிஆரு நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்Name', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'si': 'ඇමෝබී සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 1: GRU න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය CNN අවධානයක් සමග සංවේදනය විදියට', 'so': 'Amobee at SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'sv': 'Amobee på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: GRU Neural Network med CNN-uppmärksamhetsmekanism för känsloklassificering', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Yêu cầu tại Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 1: Hệ thần kinh GRU Với cơ chế gây chú ý của CNN cho khâu cho tình cảm.', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Неврологична мрежа на ГРУ с механизъм за внимание на ЦНС за класификация на чувствата', 'nl': 'Amobee bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: GRU Neural Netwerk met een CNN Aandacht Mechanisme voor Sentiment Classificatie', 'hr': 'Amobee na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: GRU Neuralna mreža s CNN-om mehanizam pozornosti za sentimentnu klasifikaciju', 'da': "Amobee ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: GRU Neural Network med CNN's opmærksomhedsmekanisme til følelsesklassificering", 'ko': 'Amobee가 SemEval-18 퀘스트 1:GRU 신경 네트워크와 CNN 주의 메커니즘은 정서 분류에 사용', 'id': 'Amobee di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Jaringan Neural GRU dengan Mekanisme Perhatian CNN untuk Klasifikasi Sentiment', 'de': 'Amobee bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 1: GRU Neuronales Netzwerk mit CNN Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus zur Stimmungsklassifikation', 'sw': 'Amobee katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Mtandao wa Nyasiri ya GRU yenye mfumo wa Uchunguzi wa CNN', 'fa': 'Amobee at SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'tr': 'Amobee at SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'am': 'ስራ 1: GRU ኔural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'hy': 'Ամոբիա 2018-ի «ՍեմԷվալ» 1-րդ հանձնարարությունը. GRU-ի նյարդային ցանց, որը ունի CNN-ի ուշադրության մեխանիզմ զգացմունքների դասակարգման համար', 'af': "Amobee by SemEval-2018 Taak 1: GRU Neural Network met 'n CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification", 'sq': 'Amobee në SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN attention mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'ca': 'Amobee a SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'az': 'Amobee at SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের অ্যামোবি: গ্রিউ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের সিএনএন-এর মনোযোগ মেকেন্দ্রের জন্য সেনিমেন্ট ক্লাসিকেশনের জন', 'cs': 'Amobee na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Neurální síť GRU s mechanismem pozornosti CNN pro klasifikaci sentimentů', 'bs': 'Amobee na semiEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neuralna mreža sa CNN-om mehanizam pozornosti za sentimentnu klasifikaciju', 'et': 'Amobee SemEval-2018 ülesandel 1: GRU neuraalne võrgustik CNN tähelepanumehhanismiga tunnete klassifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'Amobee SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU:n hermoverkosto CNN:n huomiomekanismilla tunteiden luokitteluun', 'sk': 'Amobee na SemEval-2018 naloga 1: GRU nevralna mreža z mehanizmom pozornosti CNN za klasifikacijo čustev', 'jv': 'amount', 'ha': 'Amobe at SemEV-2018 Tafiyar 1: GRU Neural Networkload with a CNN AttAttAttitory Mekanici for SemEClassification', 'bo': 'Amobee at SemEval-2018 Task 1: GRU Neural Network with a CNN Attention Mechanism for Sentiment Classification', 'he': 'אמובה ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 1: רשת נוירולית GRU עם מכונות תשומת לב CNN לסימון רגשות'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the participation of Amobee in the shared sentiment analysis task at SemEval 2018. We participated in all the English sub-tasks and the Spanish valence tasks. Our system consists of three parts : training task-specific word embeddings, training a model consisting of gated-recurrent-units (GRU) with a convolution neural network (CNN) attention mechanism and training stacking-based ensembles for each of the sub-tasks. Our algorithm reached the 3rd and 1st places in the valence ordinal classification sub-tasks in English and Spanish, respectively.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركة Amobee في مهمة تحليل المشاعر المشتركة في SemEval 2018. شاركنا في جميع المهام الفرعية باللغة الإنجليزية ومهام التكافؤ الإسبانية. يتكون نظامنا من ثلاثة أجزاء: تدريب على تضمين الكلمات الخاصة بمهمة محددة ، وتدريب نموذج يتكون من وحدات بوابات متكررة (GRU) مع آلية انتباه شبكة عصبية التفافية (CNN) ومجموعات قائمة على التكديس للتدريب لكل مهمة من المهام الفرعية . وصلت الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا إلى المركزين الثالث والأول في المهام الفرعية لتصنيف التكافؤ الترتيبي باللغتين الإنجليزية والإسبانية ، على التوالي.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a participação da Amobee na tarefa de análise de sentimento compartilhado no SemEval 2018. Participamos de todas as subtarefas de inglês e das tarefas de valência de espanhol. Nosso sistema consiste em três partes: treinamento de incorporação de palavras específicas da tarefa, treinamento de um modelo que consiste em unidades recorrentes fechadas (GRU) com um mecanismo de atenção de rede neural de convolução (CNN) e treinamento de conjuntos baseados em empilhamento para cada uma das subtarefas . Nosso algoritmo alcançou o 3º e 1º lugares nas subtarefas de classificação ordinal de valência em inglês e espanhol, respectivamente.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe la participación de Amobee en la tarea de análisis de sentimientos compartidos en SemEval 2018. Participamos en todas las subtareas de inglés y de valencia en español. Nuestro sistema consta de tres partes: entrenamiento de incrustaciones de palabras específicas de tareas, entrenamiento de un modelo que consiste en unidades recurrentes cerradas (GRU) con un mecanismo de atención de red neuronal de convolución (CNN) y entrenamiento de conjuntos basados en apilamiento para cada una de las subtareas. Nuestro algoritmo alcanzó los puestos 3 y 1 en las subtareas de clasificación ordinal de valencia en inglés y español, respectivamente.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la participation d'Amobee à la tâche d'analyse des sentiments partagés lors du SemEval 2018. Nous avons participé à toutes les sous-tâches en anglais et aux tâches de valence en espagnol. Notre système se compose de trois parties\xa0: la formation d'intégrations de mots spécifiques à une tâche, la formation d'un modèle composé d'unités récurrentes fermées (GRU) avec un mécanisme d'attention de réseau neuronal à convolution (CNN) et la formation d'ensembles basés sur l'empilement pour chacune des sous-tâches. Notre algorithme a atteint les 3e et 1re places dans les sous-tâches de classification ordinale de valence en anglais et en espagnol, respectivement.", 'ja': '本稿では、AmobeeがSemEval 2018の共有感情分析タスクに参加したことについて説明する。私たちは、すべての英語のサブタスクとスペイン語の価値のタスクに参加しました。当社のシステムは、3つの部分から構成されています。タスク固有の単語埋め込みのトレーニング、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）の注意メカニズムを備えたゲート型リカレントユニット（ GRU ）からなるモデルのトレーニング、および各サブタスクのためのスタッキングベースのアンサンブルのトレーニングです。私たちのアルゴリズムは、英語とスペイン語の原子価順位分類サブタスクでそれぞれ3位と1位に達しました。', 'zh': '本文引Amobee与SemEval 2018共享情事。 凡诸英语子事西班牙语效价。 三者:练特定于辞,门控循环单元(GRU)与卷积神经网络(CNN)意机,与子教之于积。 吾算法各于英语、西班牙语之价序,至于第3位及第1位。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается участие Amobee в задаче анализа общих настроений на SemEval 2018. Мы участвовали во всех английских подзадачах и испанских валентных задачах. Наша система состоит из трех частей: обучающие встраивания слов для конкретной задачи, обучающая модель, состоящая из синхронных блоков (GRU) с механизмом внимания сверточной нейронной сети (CNN) и обучающие ансамбли на основе стекирования для каждой из подзадач. Наш алгоритм достиг 3-го и 1-го мест в подзадачах валентной ординарной классификации на английском и испанском языках соответственно.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2018 में साझा भावना विश्लेषण कार्य में अमोबी की भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है। हमने सभी अंग्रेजी उप-कार्यों और स्पेनिश वैलेंस कार्यों में भाग लिया। हमारे सिस्टम में तीन भाग होते हैं: प्रशिक्षण कार्य-विशिष्ट शब्द एम्बेडिंग, एक मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करना जिसमें गेटेड-आवर्तक-इकाइयां (जीआरयू) शामिल हैं, जिसमें एक कनवल्शन न्यूरल नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) ध्यान तंत्र और प्रशिक्षण स्टैकिंग-आधारित ensembles प्रत्येक उप-कार्यों के लिए शामिल हैं। हमारा एल्गोरिथ्म क्रमशः अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश में वैलेंस ऑर्डिनल वर्गीकरण उप-कार्यों में तीसरे और पहले स्थान पर पहुंच गया।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar rannpháirtíocht Amobee sa tasc anailíse sentiment roinnte ag SemEval 2018. Ghlacamar páirt i bhfo-thascanna Béarla agus tascanna valence na Spáinne. Tá trí chuid inár gcóras: oiliúint a chur ar leabú focal a bhaineann go sonrach le tasc, múnla a oiliúint ina bhfuil aonaid gated-athfhillteach (GRU) le meicníocht aire líonra convolution (CNN) agus oiliúint ensembles cruachta-bhunaithe do gach ceann de na fo-tascanna. . Shroich ár n-algartam an 3ú agus an 1ú áit sna fo-thascanna aicmithe ornáideacha valence i mBéarla agus i Spáinnis, faoi seach.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერს ამობის დაწყვეტილება საერთო სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის რაოდენობაში SemEval 2018-ში. ჩვენ ყველა ანგლისური სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალებში და სპანელი სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალებით. ჩვენი სისტემა სამი ნაწილის შეფარდება: დავარწმუნოთ საქმე სპეციფიკალური სიტყვების შესაბამისი, მოდელის შესაბამისი მოდელი, რომელიც შეფარდება შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი ნეიროლური ქსელის შესაბამისი მექანსი ჩვენი ალგორიტიმი მიიღეთ სამი და ერთი ადგილებში გავალენსი ორგანილური კლასიფიკაციის საკუთარი საქმედები ინგლისური და სპანელი.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja Amobee részvételét a SemEval 2018-as közös érzelmek elemzésében. Részt vettünk az összes angol alcsoportban és a spanyol valencia feladatban. Rendszerünk három részből áll: feladatspecifikus szóbeágyazások kiképzése, egy gated-recurrent-units (GRU) modell kiképzése egy konvolúciós neurális hálózat (CNN) figyelemmechanizmussal és egy halmozás alapú együttesek kiképzése az egyes alfeladatokhoz. Algoritmusunk a 3. és 1. helyet érte el a valencia rendeleti osztályozási alcsoportokban angol és spanyol nyelven.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή της στην κοινή εργασία ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων στο SemEval 2018. Συμμετείχαμε σε όλες τις αγγλικές δευτερεύουσες εργασίες και στις ισπανικές εργασίες valence. Το σύστημά μας αποτελείται από τρία μέρη: εκπαίδευση συγκεκριμένων λέξεων για κάθε εργασία, εκπαίδευση ενός μοντέλου που αποτελείται από περιφραγμένες-επαναλαμβανόμενες μονάδες (με μηχανισμό προσοχής νευρωνικού δικτύου (ΚΝΝ) και εκπαίδευση συνόλων βασισμένων σε στοίβες για κάθε δευτερεύουσα εργασία. Ο αλγόριθμος μας έφτασε στην 3η και 1η θέση στις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες ταξινόμησης στην αγγλική και την ισπανική γλώσσα αντίστοιχα.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive la partecipazione di Amobee al compito condiviso di analisi del sentiment a SemEval 2018. Abbiamo partecipato a tutti i sottocompiti inglesi e ai compiti di valenza spagnola. Il nostro sistema si compone di tre parti: formazione di embedding di parole specifiche per attività, formazione di un modello costituito da unità gated-recurent-units (GRU) con un meccanismo di attenzione della rete neurale di convoluzione (CNN) e formazione di ensemble basati su stacking per ciascuno dei sottocompiti. Il nostro algoritmo ha raggiunto il 3° e il 1° posto nelle sottoclassificazioni ordinali di valenza rispettivamente in inglese e spagnolo.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылы SemEval үшін Amobee қатынасын ортақ сезімді анализ тапсырмасында қатынастығын анықтайды. Біз ағылшын тілінің ішкі тапсырмаларында және Испан валенциялық тапсырмаларында қатынасыз. Біздің жүйеміз үш бөліктен тұрады: тапсырманың ерекше сөздерді ендіру, қайталанатын бірліктерді (GRU) құру үлгісін біріктіру невралдық желі (CNN) механизмі мен бағыттау механизмі, әрбір ішкі тапсырмалар үшін стектеу негізінде қо Алгоритміз кәдімгі үшінші және бірінші орындалық классификациялық ішкі тапсырмаларда ағылшын және испан тілінде жеткізді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas Amobee dalyvavimas bendros jausmų analizės užduotyje 2018 m. SemEval. Mes dalyvavome visose anglų kalbos pusužduotyse ir Ispanijos valencijos užduotyse. Mūsų sistemą sudaro trys dalys: mokymas konkrečioms užduotims skirtų žodžių įterpimui, modelio mokymas, kurį sudaro vartų pakartotiniai vienetai (GRU) su konvoliucinio nervinio tinklo (CNN) dėmesio mechanizmu ir mokymo komplektai, pagrįsti stacking ensembles kiekvienai iš jų. Mūsų algoritmas pasiekė trečią ir pirmą vietas valencijos ordinarinio klasifikavimo subužduotyse atitinkamai anglų ir ispanų kalbomis.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува учеството на Амоби во задачата за споделена анализа на чувствата на SemEval 2018 година. Ние учествувавме во сите англиски подзадачи и на шпанските валентни задачи. Нашиот систем се состои од три дела: обука на специфични зборови за задачи, обука на модел кој се состои од портирани рецидентни единици (GRU) со механизам на внимание на конволуционалната невројална мрежа (CNN) и обука на ансембли базирани на групи за секоја од подзадачите Нашиот алгоритм ги достигна третите и првите места во военцијалната ординална класификација на англиски и шпански, односно.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan participasi Amobee dalam tugas analisis sentimen berkongsi di SemEval 2018. Kami berpartisipasi dalam semua sub-tugas Inggeris dan tugas valensi Spanyol. Sistem kami terdiri dari tiga bahagian: pelatihan pembenaman perkataan khusus tugas, pelatihan model yang terdiri dari unit-pengulang-gerbang (GRU) dengan mekanisme perhatian rangkaian saraf konvolution (CNN) dan ensembles berdasarkan stacking untuk setiap tugas-sub. Algoritma kita mencapai tempat ke-3 dan ke-1 dalam subtugas klasifikasi ordinal valensi dalam bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol, berdasarkan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d അമോബിയുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നത് സെമെവാല്\u200d 2018-ല്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്ത വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ ജോലിയിലാണ്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എല്ലാ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് സബ് ജോലികളിലും സ്പാനിഷ് വാലന്\u200dസ് ജോലികളിലും പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d മൂന്നു ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉണ്ട്: ട്രെയിനിസ്റ്റിംഗ്-പ്രത്യേക വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്കുള്ള പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്- പിന്നീട് ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന യൂണിറ്റ ഞങ്ങളുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം മൂന്നാം സ്ഥലങ്ങളിലേക്കും ആദ്യത്തേതും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കും സ്പാനിഷിലേക്കും സാധാരണ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d', 'mn': 'Энэ мэдээллийн санааны шинжилгээ 2018 оны SemEval-д Амобийн оролцоог тайлбарладаг. Бид Англи хэлний суб-даалгаврууд болон Испанийн суб-даалгаврууд дээр оролцсон. Бидний систем гурван хэсгийг бүрдүүлдэг: дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал хэлбэрээр, дахин дахин дахин давтагдах нэгжүүдийн (GRU) загварын хөгжүүлэлт, анхаарлын мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд (CNN) анхаарлын механизм, суб-дасгал бүрт су Бидний алгоритм нь англи болон Испан хэлний 3, 1-р хэсэгт тэнцүү хэмжээсүүд дээр хүрсэн.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver deltakaren av Amobee i delte sentimentanalyseoppgåva i semiEval 2018. Vi deltok på alle underoppgåvene i engelsk og spanske valensoppgåvene. Sistemet vårt inneheld av tre deler: oppgåve-spesifikke ordinnbygging, opplæring av eit modell som inneheld gated-recurrent-einingar (GRU) med ein konvolusjonsneuralnettverk (CNN) opplæringsmekanisme og opplæring-basert ensembler for kvar av underoppgåver. Algoritmen vårt har nådd dei tredje og første plassane i den valjande ordenalske underoppgåva i engelsk og spansk.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje udział Amobee w wspólnym zadaniu analizy sentymentów na SemEval 2018. Uczestniczyliśmy we wszystkich podzadaniach angielskich i hiszpańskich walencjach. Nasz system składa się z trzech części: szkolenia osadzeń słów specyficznych dla zadania, szkolenia modelu składającego się z gated-recovering-unit (GRU) z mechanizmem uwagi sieci neuronowej (CNN) oraz zespołów szkoleniowych opartych na stosach dla każdego z podzadań. Nasz algorytm osiągnął trzecie i pierwsze miejsce w podzadaniach klasyfikacji ordynacji walencji w języku angielskim i hiszpańskim.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie participarea Amobee la sarcina comună de analiză a sentimentelor la SemEval 2018. Am participat la toate subsarcinile în limba engleză și la sarcinile de valență spaniolă. Sistemul nostru constă în trei părți: instruirea încorporărilor de cuvinte specifice sarcinilor, instruirea unui model format din unități recurente gated (GRU) cu mecanism de atenție al rețelei neurale de convoluție (CNN) și instruirea ansamblurilor bazate pe stivuire pentru fiecare subsarcină. Algoritmul nostru a ajuns pe locurile 3 și 1 în subsarcinile de clasificare ordonală de valență în limba engleză și, respectiv, spaniolă.', 'mt': 'This paper describes the participation of Amobee in the shared sentiment analysis task at SemEval 2018.  We participated in all the English sub-tasks and the Spanish valence tasks.  Is-sistema tagħna tikkonsisti minn tliet partijiet: taħriġ ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem speċifiċi għal kompiti, taħriġ ta’ mudell li jikkonsisti f’unitajiet rikorrenti b’gated-gated (GRU) b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni tan-netwerk newrali ta’ konvoluzzjoni (CNN) u ensembles ta’ taħriġ ibbażati fuq stacking għal kull wieħed mis-sottokompiti. L-algoritmu tagħna laħaq it-tielet u l-ewwel post fis-sottokompiti tal-klassifikazzjoni ordinali tal-valenza bl-Ingliż u bl-Ispanjol, rispettivament.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje Amobee u zadatku za analizu osećanja na semiEvalu 2018. Участили смо у свим английским подзадачима и испанским задачима за валенцију. Naš sistem se sastoji od tri dijela: obuka određenih reči za zadatak, obuka model a koja se sastoji od preuređenih jedinica (GRU) sa konvolucijskim neuralnim mrežom (CNN) pažnjom i obukom na stakovima baziranim ensemblima za svaki od podzadataka. Naš algoritam je stigao na 3. i 1. mjesta na odgovarajućim podzadatkima za klasifikaciju pravila na engleskom i španjolskom.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අමෝබී ගේ සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ වැඩසටහන් සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණයේ අමෝබ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් සහ ස්පැනිස් වැඩක් වලට සමාවෙන්නේ. අපේ පද්ධතිය තුනක් කොටස් වලින් තියෙනවා: ක්\u200dරියාස් විශේෂ වචනය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, ප්\u200dරධානය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධ අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් තුන්වෙනි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වල ඉංග්\u200d', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran ka qeybqaadashada Amobee oo lagu qayb qaatay shaqada analyadaada ee SemEval 2018. We participated in all the English sub-tasks and the Spanish valence tasks.  Systemkanaga waxaa ka mid ah saddex qayb: waxbarashada shaqo-specific word embeddings, ku tababarida model ka mid ah koox-gated-recurrent-units (GRU) oo leh shabakadda caqliga neurada ah (CNN) iyo waxbarashada stacking-based ensembles for each sub-task. Algoritheena waxay gaadheen meelaha saddexaad iyo kowaad ee u dhexeeya shaqooyinka hoose-tababarka afka Ingiriis iyo Isbanish.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver Amobees deltagande i den gemensamma sentimentalanalysen på SemEval 2018. Vi deltog i alla de engelska underuppgifterna och de spanska valensuppgifterna. Vårt system består av tre delar: träning av uppgiftsspecifika ordinbäddningar, träning av en modell bestående av gated-recurrent-units (GRU) med en konvulutionsneuralt nätverk (CNN) uppmärksamhetsmekanism och träning av stapelbaserade ensembler för var och en av underuppgifterna. Vår algoritm nådde 3:e och 1:a plats i valensordningens underuppgifter på engelska respektive spanska.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் அமோபி பகிர்ந்த உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சி பணியில் பகிர்ந்து கொள்ளப்பட்டதை விளக்குகிறது. நாங்கள் அனைத்து ஆங்கிலம் துணை பணிகளிலும் சேர்ந்து ஸ்பானிஷ் பள்ளி பணிகளிலும் பகிர்ந்தோம். நம் அமைப்பு மூன்று பகுதிகளில் உள்ளது: பயிற்சி செய்தி- குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுதல், துணை பணிகளுக்கு ஒவ்வொரு துணை பணிகளுக்கும் பயிற்சி செய்யும் துணை செயல்களில் உள்ள ஒர எங்கள் ஆல்goritm மூன்றாம் முதல் இடங்கள் வழக்கத்தில் சாதாரண வகுப்பு துணை பணிகளில் வந்தது, ஆங்கிலத்தில் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ்', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ نے آمبی کی حصہ کو SemEval 2018 میں مشترک احساسات تحلیل کے کام میں دکھایا ہے. ہم نے انگلیسی ساب-ٹاکس اور اسپانیایی والنس ٹاکس میں شامل کیا۔ ہمارا سیستم تین حصہ میں ہے: ٹاکس-خاص کلمات میں آموزش کرنا، ایک موڈل کی آموزش کرنا جو گٹ-ریکا-یونیٹ (GRU) میں ہے، ایک کنولوٹن نیورل نیٹ ورک (CNN) کی توجه مکانیسم اور ہر سو-ٹاکس کے لئے استکنگ-بنیادی انامبل کی آموزش کرتا ہے. ہمارا الگوریتم تیسرے اور اولوں جگہ تک پہنچ گیا، مختلف انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی میں والینس اورڈیل کلاسیفوں کے sub-tasks میں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval 2018-yilda birlashtirilgan hissiyotni aniqlash vazifasidagi Amobe ishlatishni anglatadi. We participated in all the English sub-tasks and the Spanish valence tasks.  Bizning tizimimizning uchta qismlarimizga ega bo'ladi: vazifaning xossa soʻzlarini tahrirlash, har bir vazifalar uchun qo'llangan tarmoq (CNN) hisoblanish mekanisme va taʼminlovchi tashkilotlarning har bir xil vazifalar uchun qo'llangan tarmoqni (GRU) qo'yish modelini ishlatish. Algoritmizning 3- chi va 1- chi joylarimiz o'xshash oddiy darajadagi ingliz va Ispanchaga tub vazifalarga boshqacha keldi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả sự tham gia của FAO FAO trong nhiệm vụ phân tích cảm xúc chia sẻ tại SemEvol. Chúng tôi tham gia tất cả các chi nhánh Anh và các công việc phát triển của Tây Ban Nha. Hệ thống của chúng ta gồm ba phần: sự bổ sung từ đặc nhiệm huấn luyện, huấn luyện một mô hình gồm các đơn vị nội bộ thông thường (GRU) với một cơ chế tập trung dây thần kinh (CNN) và huấn luyện các kết hợp dựa trên cấu trúc ghép cho mỗi công việc phụ. Thuật toán của chúng tôi đạt đến địa điểm thứ ba và thứ nhất... trong phân bổ nhiệm vụ phân loại kính trọng... ở bên Anh và Tây Ban Nha.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje Amobee u zadatku analize osjećaja na semiEvalu 2018. Učestvovali smo u svim engleskim podzadatkima i španjolskim zadatkima za valenciju. Naš sustav se sastoji od tri dijela: obuka određenih riječi za zadatak, obuka model a koja se sastoji od prikupljenih recikliranih jedinica (GRU) sa konvolucijskim neuralnom mrežom (CNN) pažnjom i obuke na staku osnovane ensemble za svaki od podzadataka. Naš algoritam je postigao 3. i 1. mjesta na odgovarajućim podzadatkima za klasifikaciju odgovarajućih redovita na engleskom i španjolskom.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва участието на Амобеи в задачата за споделен анализ на сентимента на СемЕвал 2018. Участвахме във всички английски подзадачи и в испанските валентни задачи. Нашата система се състои от три части: обучение на специфични задачи за вграждане на думи, обучение на модел, състоящ се от затворени рецидивиращи единици (ГРУ) с механизъм за внимание на конволюционната невронна мрежа (ЦНН) и обучение на базата на стекове за всяка от подзадачите. Алгоритъмът ни достигна 3-то и 1-то място в подзадачите за валентна класификация съответно на английски и испански език.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft de deelname van Amobee aan de gedeelde sentimentanalyse taak bij SemEval 2018. We hebben deelgenomen aan alle Engelse deeltaken en de Spaanse valentietaken. Ons systeem bestaat uit drie delen: training taakspecifieke woordembeddingen, training van een model bestaande uit gated-recidiving-units (GRU) met een convolution neural network (CNN) aandachtsmechanisme en training op stapeling gebaseerde ensembles voor elk van de subtaken. Ons algoritme bereikte de 3e en 1e plaats in de valentie ordinale classificatie subtaken in respectievelijk Engels en Spaans.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver Amobees deltagelse i den fælles sentimentalanalyseopgave på SemEval 2018. Vi deltog i alle de engelske underopgaver og de spanske valensopgaver. Vores system består af tre dele: træning af opgavespecifikke ordindlejringer, træning af en model bestående af gated-recurent-units (GRU) med en konvulution neural netværk (CNN) opmærksomhedsmekanisme og træning stabelbaserede ensembler til hver af underopgaverne. Vores algoritme nåede 3. og 1. pladsen i valens ordinær klassificering underopgaver på henholdsvis engelsk og spansk.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die Beteiligung von Amobee an der gemeinsamen Stimmungsanalyse bei SemEval 2018. Wir haben an allen Teilaufgaben in Englisch und Spanisch teilgenommen. Unser System besteht aus drei Teilen: Training aufgabenspezifischer Worteinbettungen, Training eines Modells bestehend aus gated-recidivierenden Einheiten (GRU) mit einem Faltungsneuronalen Netzwerk (CNN) Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus und Training stapelbasierter Ensembles für jede der Teilaufgaben. Unser Algorithmus erreichte den dritten und ersten Platz in den Teilaufgaben der valenzordinalen Klassifizierung in Englisch und Spanisch.', 'id': 'This paper describes the participation of Amobee in the shared sentiment analysis task at SemEval 2018.  Kami berpartisipasi dalam semua sub-tugas Inggris dan tugas valensi Spanyol. Sistem kita terdiri dari tiga bagian: pelatihan pembangunan kata spesifik tugas, pelatihan model yang terdiri dari unit-recurrent-gated (GRU) dengan mekanisme perhatian jaringan saraf konvolusi (CNN) dan pelatihan ensembles berdasarkan stacking untuk masing-masing sub-tugas. Algoritma kita mencapai tempat ke-3 dan ke-1 dalam subtugas klasifikasi ordinal valensi dalam bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol, sesuai.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ushiriki wa Amobee katika jukumu la uchambuzi wa hisia katika SemEval 2018. Tumeshiriki katika kazi zote za Uingereza na kazi za mabadiliko ya Kihispania. Mfumo wetu unajumuisha sehemu tatu: mafunzo ya maneno maalum ya kufanya kazi, kufundisha modeli inayojumuisha viungo vya kurudi tena (GRU) na mtandao wa asili ya kisasa (CNN) wa kusikiliza na mafunzo yanayotumika kwa kila kazi hizo. Ualgorithi wetu ulifikia maeneo ya tatu na ya kwanza katika kazi za usawa wa kawaida katika lugha ya Kiingereza na Kihispania.', 'ko': '본고는 아모비가 2018년 SemEval에서 정서 분석 공유 임무에 참여한 상황을 묘사한다.우리는 모든 영어 하위 임무와 스페인어 가격 조정 임무에 참가했다.우리의 시스템은 세 부분으로 구성되어 있다. 훈련 임무에 특정한 단어가 삽입되고, 훈련은 권적신경망 (CNN) 주의 메커니즘을 가진 문 제어 귀속 단원 (GRU) 으로 구성된 모델, 그리고 모든 하위 임무에 대한 훈련은 창고 기반의 집합이다.우리의 알고리즘은 각각 영어와 스페인어의 가격 서열 분류 하위 임무 중 3위와 1위를 차지했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت آموبی در کار تحلیل احساسات مشترک در SemEval 2018 توصیف می\u200cکند. ما در تمام عملیات زیر انگلیسی و عملیات والینس اسپانیایی شرکت کردیم. سیستم ما از سه بخشی است: آموزش کلمه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای به کار آموزش می\u200cدهد، آموزش یک مدل از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cها (GRU) با یک مکانیسم توجه\u200cی شبکه عصبی (CNN) و آموزش آموزش\u200cها بر اساس جمع\u200cآوری\u200cها برای هر یک از زیر کار است. الگوریتم ما به سمت سوم و اولین مکان در قسمت\u200cهای مختلف قانونی به انگلیسی و اسپانیایی رسید.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz Amobee duýgular analyzasynda SemEval 2018-nji ýylda bäsleşigini tassyklaýar. Biz iňlisçe subuzmanlaryň we ispanyýanyň beýleki zadyna chikanchasdyk. Biziň sistemamyz üç bölümden bar: taýýarlanmak üçin häzirki söz integratlaryny okuw taýýarlamak, gatalan-tekrarly-birleşmeler (GRU) bilen meýdança näyral şebek (CNN) üns meýdançasynda gözlenme meýdançasynda çykmak we ýerleşmekde tabanly guramlary bar. Biziň algoritmymyz üçünji we birinji ýerleri diňlis we ispaňlyk bilen meňzeş taýýarlanan eserlerde ýetirdi.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan pjesëmarrjen e Amobee në detyrën e përbashkët të analizës së ndjenjave në SemEval 2018. Ne morëm pjesë në të gjitha nëndetyrat angleze dhe detyrat e valencës spanjolle. Sistemi ynë përbëhet nga tre pjesë: stërvitja e përfshirjes së fjalëve specifike për detyrat, stërvitja e një modeli përbëhet nga njësitë e portave të përsëritura (GRU) me një mekanizëm vëmendjeje të rrjetit nervor konvolutor (CNN) dhe stërvitja e ansambleve të bazuara në stacking për secilën nga nëndetyrat. Algoritmi ynë arriti vendin e tretë dhe të parë në nëndetyrat e klasifikimit ordinal të valencës respektivisht në anglisht dhe spanjoll.', 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ አሜቦቤን በተካፈለው የስሜምEval 2018 አካባቢ ትምህርት ትምህርት ማድረግ ይናገራል፡፡ እንግሊዝኛ አዳራሽ ስራዎችን እና ስፓኒስታን የዋና ስራዎችን ተካፈልን፡፡ ስርዓታችን ሦስት ክፍሎች ነው፤ የስራ-የተለየ ቃላት ግንኙነት እና ለሁሉም ደብዳቤ ስራዎችን ለመግጠሚያ እና ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን የደብዳቤ ነጥብ መረብ (CNN) ምክረት ማድረጊያውን እና የተመሳሰለውን ድምፅ ማስተካከል፡፡ አሌጎራይማችን በተለየ በንግግሊስና በስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ የተደረገውን የሦስተኛውና መጀመሪያ ስፍራዎች ደረሰ።', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է Ամոբիի մասնակցությունը 2018 թվականի "Սեմեվալ" զգացմունքների վերլուծության ընթացքում: Մենք մասնակցեցինք անգլերենի բոլոր ենթախնդիրներին և իսպաներեն վալենցիայի խնդիրներին: Մեր համակարգը կազմված է երեք մասից. ուսուցանում է խնդիրների մասնավոր բառերի ներդրումներ, ուսուցանում է մոդել, որը կազմված է դարանի-կրկնվող միավորներից (GRU) և որը ունի հակադարձ նյարդային ցանցի (CNN) ուշադրության մեխանիզմ և ուսուցանում է կառուցվածքի հիմնված էնսեմբեր Մեր ալգորիթմը հասավ 3-րդ և 1-րդ տեղերին անգլերենում և իսպաներենում գտնվող վալենցիայի օրինական դասակարգման ենթախնդիրներում:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা সেমইভাল ২০১৮-এ অংশগ্রহণ করা অনুভূতিবিশ্লেষণ কাজে আমোবির অংশগ্রহণের কথা বর্ণনা করেছে। আমরা সব ইংরেজী সাব-কাজ এবং স্প্যানিশ ভ্যালেন্স কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছি। আমাদের সিস্টেম তিনটি অংশের মধ্যে রয়েছে: প্রশিক্ষণ-নির্দিষ্ট কার্যক্রম-বিশেষ শব্দের প্রশিক্ষণ, পুনরাবৃত্তিক ইউনিটের (GRU) একটি মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করা হচ্ছে, যার মধ্যে প্রত্যেক সা আমাদের অ্যালগরিদম ভাবে ইংরেজি ও স্প্যানিশ ভাষায় তৃতীয় এবং প্রথম স্থানে পৌঁছেছে।', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval-də olan hiss analizi işində Amobee'nin paylaşılmasını təsdiq edir. Biz İngilizə bütün apa işlərdə və İspanyolca valence işlərdə iştirak etdik. Sistemimiz üç parçalardır: task-specific word embeddings təhsil edir, gated-recurrent-units (GRU) ilə birləşdirilmiş nöral a ğ (CNN) məktəbinə sahib bir modeli təhsil edir və hər bir sub-task üçün stacking-based ensembles təhsil edir. Algoritimiz üçüncü və birinci yerə müəyyən edilən düzgün klasifikasiya apa işləri İngilizce və İspanyolca çatdı.", 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu la participació d'Amobee en la tasca compartida d'anàlisi de sentiments a SemEval 2018. We participated in all the English sub-tasks and the Spanish valence tasks.  El nostre sistema consisteix en tres parts: formar integracions de paraules específices per a les tasques, formar un model compost d'unitats recurrents portades (GRU) amb un mecanisme d'atenció de la xarxa neural de convolució (CNN) i formar conjunts basats en piles per cada una de les subtasques. Our algorithm reached the 3rd and 1st places in the valence ordinal classification sub-tasks in English and Spanish, respectively.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje účast Amobee na sdíleném úkolu analýzy sentimentů na SemEvalu 2018. Účastnili jsme se všech anglických podúkolů a španělských valenčních úkolů. Náš systém se skládá ze tří částí: tréninkové vložení slov specifických pro úkoly, trénink modelu sestávajícího z gated-recidiving-jednotek (GRU) s pozornostním mechanismem konvoluční neuronové sítě (CNN) a tréninkové sestavy založené na stohování pro každou z dílčích úkolů. Náš algoritmus dosáhl třetího a prvního místa v podúkolech klasifikace valence ordinální v angličtině a španělštině.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse Amobee osalemist SemEval 2018 ühise sentimentaalüüsi ülesandes. Osalesime kõigis inglise alamülesannetes ja Hispaania valentsi ülesannetes. Meie süsteem koosneb kolmest osast: ülesandespetsiifiliste sõnaseadmete koolitamine, CNN-i tähelepanumehhanismiga suletud korduvatest üksustest koosneva mudeli koolitamine ja virnastamisel põhinevad ansamblid iga alamülesande jaoks. Meie algoritm jõudis 3. ja 1. kohale vastavalt inglise ja hispaania keeles valentsi ordinaalse klassifikatsiooni alamülesannetes.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die deelnadering van Amobee in die gedeelde sentimentanaliseerde taak by SemEval 2018. Ons het gedeel in al die Engelse sub-taak en die Spaanse valense taak. Ons stelsel bestaan van drie dele: oefening van opdrag-spesifieke woord inbettings, oefening van 'n model wat bestaan van gated-recurrent-units (GRU) met 'n konvolusie neuralnetwerk (CNN) aandag mekanisme en opleiing stapel-gebaseerde ensembles vir elke van die subtaak. Ons algoritme het die 3de en 1de plekke in die valense ordeel klassifikasie subtaak in Engels en Spaanse bereik.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan Amobeen osallistumista SemEval 2018:n yhteiseen tunteiden analysointitehtävään. Osallistuimme kaikkiin englanninkielisiin alatehtäviin ja espanjalaisiin valenssitehtäviin. Järjestelmämme koostuu kolmesta osasta: tehtäväkohtaisten sanaupotusten harjoittelusta, suljetuista toistuvista yksiköistä (GRU) koostuvan mallin harjoittelusta konvolution neural network (CNN) -huomiomekanismilla sekä pinoamiseen perustuvista kokoonpanoista kutakin osatehtävää varten. Algoritmimme saavutti 3. sijan valenssiordinaaliluokituksen osatehtävissä englanniksi ja 1. sijan espanjaksi.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje Amobee u zadatku analize osjećaja na semiEvalu 2018. Mi smo sudjelovali u svim engleskim podzadacima i zadacima španjolske valencije. Naš sistem se sastoji od tri dijela: obuka određene riječi za zadatak, obuka model a koja se sastoji od prikupljenih rekonstruacijskih jedinica (GRU) sa konvolucijskim neuralnim mrežom (CNN) pažnjom i obuke na staku osnovane ensemble za svaki od podzadataka. Naš algoritam je stigao na 3. i 1. mjesta na odgovarajućim odgovarajućim podzadatkima za klasifikaciju organa na engleskom i španjolskom.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את השתתפות של אמובי במשימת ניתוח הרגשות המשותפת בסימוול 2018. השתתפנו בכל התפקידים האנגליים והמשימות האהובה הספרדית. המערכת שלנו מורכבת משלושה חלקים: אימון מילים ספציפיות למשימות, אימון מודל מורכב מאחידות משער-חוזרות (GRU) עם מנגנון תשומת לב של רשת עצבית משתנה (CNN) ואימון אסמבלים מבוססים על עקבות לכל אחד מהמשימות התחתונות. האלגוריתם שלנו הגיע למקומות השלישיים והראשונים בתפקידים מסווגים אורגניים באנגלית ובספרדית, בהתאם.', 'ha': 'Wannan takardan na bayyana shirin Amobe a cikin aikin da aka yi raba fassarar hisani da Semeval 2018. Mun yi rabo da dukkan taskõkin Ingiriya da dukkan taskõki na Isbanish. Tsarinmu na ƙunsa da rabon aiki uku: Algorityinmu ya kai a matsayin na uku da na farko a cikin masu bin-fasalin na daban Ingiriya da Isbanish.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisano sodelovanje Amobeeja v skupni nalogi analize sentimenta na SemEvalu 2018. Sodelovali smo pri vseh angleških podnalogah in španskih nalogah valence. Naš sistem je sestavljen iz treh delov: usposabljanje za nalogo specifičnih besednih vdelav, usposabljanje modela, sestavljenega iz zaprtih ponavljajočih enot (GRU) z mehanizmom pozornosti konvolucijskega nevronskega omrežja (CNN) in usposabljanje na osnovi zlaganja ansamblov za vsako od podnalog. Naš algoritem je dosegel 3. mesto in 1. mesto v podnalogah valenčne ordinalne klasifikacije v angleščini oziroma španščini.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་ཨ་མོ་བི་ཡི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་གི་གོ་སྐབས་བཅས་ཀྱི་མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་དང་སྐར་ཆེན་གྱི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་དུ་ཆ་ཤས་གསུམ་ཡོད། ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ལ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་algorithm་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་སྒྲ་སྐད་དབྱེ་བ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གསུམ་དང་༡པ་ལ་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambarang nggawe Jejaraké amoBee nang nggawe panjenengan langgambar kelas nang seminval 2008. Awak dhéwé nglanggar-langgar nganggo cara-cara sing ingkang karo nganggo cara sing karo Perancis Sistem awak dhéwé wis sistem sing wis ana karo telu pating: tukang task-special word embedding, tukang sistem sing bisa gated Algorithm dhéwé wis rak tanggal 3 lan 1 saiki, dadi kapan tanggal apat-task kanggo ingkang karo Spanyola karo Perancis.'}
{'en': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Emotion Intensity Prediction Using Effective Features and Machine Learning Models', 'ar': 'ECNU في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: توقع كثافة العاطفة باستخدام الميزات الفعالة ونماذج التعلم الآلي', 'es': 'Tarea 1 de ECNU en SemEval-2018: Predicción de la intensidad de las emociones mediante características eficaces y modelos de aprendizaje automático', 'fr': "ECNU au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Prédiction de l'intensité des émotions à l'aide de fonctionnalités efficaces et de modèles d'apprentissage automatique", 'pt': 'ECNU no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Previsão de intensidade de emoção usando recursos eficazes e modelos de aprendizado de máquina', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर ECNU: प्रभावी सुविधाओं और मशीन लर्निंग मॉडल का उपयोग करके भावना तीव्रता भविष्यवाणी', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のECNUタスク1 ：効果的な機能と機械学習モデルを使用した感情の強度予測', 'zh': '华东师范大学在SemEval-2018务1:用有效机器学度情', 'ru': 'ECNU на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Прогнозирование интенсивности эмоций с использованием эффективных функций и моделей машинного обучения', 'ga': 'ECNU ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Tuar ar Dhéine Mothúcháin ag Úsáid Gnéithe Éifeachtúla agus Múnlaí Foghlama Meaisín', 'el': 'Καθήκον 1: Πρόβλεψη έντασης συναισθημάτων με χρήση αποτελεσματικών χαρακτηριστικών και μοντέλων μηχανικής μάθησης', 'hu': 'ECNU a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Az érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzése hatékony funkciók és gépi tanulási modellek használatával', 'kk': 'ECNU 1- жарым Eval- 2018 тапсырмасында: көңіл қанықтығының алдындағы эффективті мүмкіндіктерді және машинаны оқыту үлгілерін қолдану', 'ka': 'ECNU SemEval-2018 დავალება 1: ემოციონის ინტენტინტივის პრედიქცია გამოყენება ეფექტიური ფუნქციები და მაქსინის სწავლების მოდელების გამოყენება', 'it': "ECNU a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Predizione dell'intensità emotiva utilizzando funzionalità efficaci e modelli di apprendimento automatico", 'lt': 'ECNU 2018 m. pusmečio vertinimo metu 1 užduotis: Emocijų intensyvumo prognozė naudojant veiksmingus požymius ir mašinų mokymosi modelius', 'mk': 'ЕКНУ на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Предвидување на емоционска интензитет користејќи ефективни објекти и модели за машинско учење', 'ms': 'ECNU pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Prediksi Intensiti Emosi Menggunakan Ciri-ciri Efektif dan Model Belajar Mesin', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ ECNU 1: എക്ഫിക്ടീവ് വിശേഷതകളും മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഇമോട്ടിഷന്\u200d സിറ്', 'mt': 'L-ECNU f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Tbassir ta’ Intensità Emozzjonali bl-Użu ta’ Karatteristiċi Effettivi u Mudelli ta’ Tagħlim mill-Magni', 'ro': 'ECNU la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Predicția intensității emoțiilor folosind caracteristici eficiente și modele de machine learning', 'pl': 'ECNU na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Prognoza intensywności emocji za pomocą efektywnych funkcji i modeli uczenia maszynowego', 'no': 'ECNU ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Førehandsvising for emosjonsintensitet Bruk effektive funksjonar og maskinelæringsmodeller', 'so': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Prediction Using Effective Features and Machine Learning Models', 'sv': 'ECNU p책 SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: F철ruts채gelse av k채nslointensitet med hj채lp av effektiva funktioner och maskininl채rningsmodeller', 'sr': 'ECNU na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: predviđanje emocija intenzitete korištenje efikasnih karakteristika i modela učenja mašina', 'si': 'ECNu at Half-2018 Job 1: Emotion Intensty Precdiction Using Efctive Featuries and machine leaching Models', 'mn': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Prediction Use Effective Features and Machine Learning Models', 'ur': 'ECNU ٹاکس ۱ میں: اثرات فکرات اور ماشین سیکھنے موڈل استعمال کرتا ہے', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் ECNU 1: விளைவான செயல்பாடுகள் மற்றும் இயந்திரம் கற்றுக் கொண்டு பயன்படுத்தும் உணர்வு உணர்வு முன்னுரிமை', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tập tin về cường độ cảm xúc Có hiệu quả và chế độ học về máy móc', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Прогнозиране на интензивността на емоциите чрез ефективни функции и модели на машинно обучение', 'nl': 'ECNU op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Voorspelling van emotie-intensiteit met behulp van effectieve functies en machine learning modellen', 'da': 'ECNU på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Forudsigelse af følelsesintensitet ved hjælp af effektive funktioner og maskinlæringsmodeller', 'hr': 'ECNU na zadatku 1. ispitivanja: predviđanje intenzitete emocija koristeći učinkovite karakteristike i modele učenja strojeva', 'id': 'ECNU di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Prediksi Intensitas Emosi Menggunakan Features Efektif dan Model Belajar Mesin', 'de': 'ECNU auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Emotionsintensit瓣tsvorhersage mit effektiven Features und Machine Learning Modellen', 'ko': 'ECNU가 SemEval-18 작업 1: 효과적인 특징과 기계 학습 모델을 사용하여 정서의 강도를 예측한다', 'fa': 'ECNU در ماموریت ۱ نیم Eval-2018: پیشنهاد هوشیاری احساسات با استفاده از ویژه های تاثیر و مدل یادگیری ماشین', 'sw': 'ECNU kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Udhibiti wa Ujasiri wa Kutumia Tamko Effective na Modeli za Kufundisha Mashine', 'tr': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Prediction Using Effective Features and Machine Learning Models', 'sq': 'ECNU në SemEval-2018 Detyra 1: parashikimi i intensitetit të emocioneve duke përdorur funksione efektive dhe modele mësimi i makinave', 'am': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Prediction Using Effective Features and Machine Learning Models', 'az': 'ECNU 1. 칐yr톛nm톛 칐yr톛nm톛si 칐yr톛nm톛si 칐yr톛nm톛si 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'bs': 'ECNU na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 1: predviđenje za intenzitet emocija korištenje efikasnih karakteristika i modela učenja mašina', 'hy': 'ԷԿՆԱ-ը 2018-ի կիսագնդի առաջին հանձնարարում՝ զգացմունքների խիստ կանխատեսումը, օգտագործելով էֆեկտիվ առանձնահատկություններ և մեքենային սովորելու մոդելներ', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ECNU ১: কার্যকর বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং মেশিন শিক্ষা মোডেল ব্যবহার করে Emotion Intense Prediction', 'ca': "ECNU a SemEval-2018 tasca 1: Predicció de la intensitat emocional utilitzant característiques efectives i models d'aprenentatge màquina", 'et': 'ECNU SemEval-2018 ülesanne 1: emotsioonide intensiivsuse prognoosimine tõhusate funktsioonide ja masinõppe mudelite abil', 'cs': 'ECNU na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Predikce intenzity emocí s využitím efektivních funkcí a modelů strojového učení', 'fi': 'ECNU SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 1: Tunteiden voimakkuuden ennustaminen tehokkaiden ominaisuuksien ja koneoppimismallien avulla', 'af': 'ECNU by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: Emosie Intensiteit Voorskou Gebruik Effektiewe Funksies en Masjien Leer Modelle', 'jv': 'ESNU', 'he': 'ECNU ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 1: צפייה של אינטנסיבות רגשות באמצעות תכונות יעילות ומודלים ללמוד מכונות', 'sk': 'ECNU na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Napoved intenzivnosti čustev z uporabo učinkovitih funkcij in modelov strojnega učenja', 'ha': 'ECNU at SemEl-2018 Tafiyar 1: Emotion Intense Prediction Using Use Effective Features and Moduls Learn Machine', 'bo': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Prediction Using Effective Features and Machine Learning Models'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our submissions to SemEval 2018 task 1. The task is affect intensity prediction in tweets, including five subtasks. We participated in all subtasks of English tweets. We extracted several traditional NLP, sentiment lexicon, emotion lexicon and domain specific features from tweets, adopted supervised machine learning algorithms to perform emotion intensity prediction.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit nos soumissions pour la tâche 1 du SemEval 2018. La tâche consiste à prédire l'intensité des effets dans les tweets, y compris cinq sous-tâches. Nous avons participé à toutes les tâches subordonnées des tweets en anglais. Nous avons extrait plusieurs fonctionnalités traditionnelles de la PNL, du lexique des sentiments, du lexique des émotions et des fonctionnalités spécifiques au domaine à partir de tweets, adopté des algorithmes d'apprentissage automatique supervisés pour effectuer une prédiction de l'intensité", 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة عمليات الإرسال الخاصة بنا إلى مهمة SemEval 2018 1. المهمة هي التأثير على توقع الكثافة في التغريدات ، بما في ذلك خمس مهام فرعية. شاركنا في جميع المهام الفرعية للتغريدات الإنجليزية. استخرجنا العديد من البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التقليدية ومعجم المشاعر ومعجم العاطفة وميزات خاصة بالمجال من التغريدات ، واعتمدنا خوارزميات التعلم الآلي الخاضعة للإشراف لإجراء تنبؤ شدة العاطفة.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossas submissões para a tarefa 1 do SemEval 2018. A tarefa é afetar a previsão de intensidade em tweets, incluindo cinco subtarefas. Participamos de todas as subtarefas dos tweets em inglês. Extraímos vários PNL tradicional, léxico de sentimento, léxico de emoção e recursos específicos de domínio de tweets, adotamos algoritmos de aprendizado de máquina supervisionado para realizar a previsão de intensidade de emoção.', 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestros envíos a la tarea 1 de SemEval 2018. La tarea consiste en predecir la intensidad de los efectos en los tuits, incluidas cinco subtareas. Participamos en todas las subtareas de los tuits en inglés. Extrajimos varios NLP tradicionales, léxico de sentimientos, léxico de emociones y características específicas de dominio de los tuits, adoptamos algoritmos de aprendizaje automático supervisado para realizar la predicción de la intensidad de las emociones.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2018タスク1への提出について説明します。5つのサブタスクを含む、ツイートの強度予測に影響を与えるタスクです。私たちは英語のツイートのすべてのサブタスクに参加しました。私たちは、ツイートからいくつかの伝統的なNLP、センチメント辞書、感情辞書、およびドメイン固有の機能を抽出し、感情の強度予測を実行するために監視された機械学習アルゴリズムを採用しました。', 'zh': '本文引SemEval 2018事1。 推文强度,五子之事也。 吾与英语推文之所有也。 推文取旧NLP,情词典,情词典域特定,用监机器学算法以行之。', 'ru': 'В этом документе описываются наши представления для задачи 1 SemEval 2018. Задача - повлиять на прогнозирование интенсивности в твитах, включая пять подзадач. Мы участвовали во всех подзадачах английских твитов. Мы выделили несколько традиционных NLP, лексикон настроений, лексикон эмоций и специфические для домена функции из твитов, приняли алгоритмы машинного обучения под наблюдением для выполнения прогнозирования интенсивности эмоций.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2018 कार्य 1 के लिए हमारी प्रस्तुतियों का वर्णन करता है। कार्य tweets में तीव्रता भविष्यवाणी को प्रभावित करता है, जिसमें पांच उप-कार्य शामिल हैं। हम अंग्रेजी tweets के सभी subtasks में भाग लिया. हमने ट्वीट्स से कई पारंपरिक एनएलपी, भावना शब्दकोश, भावना शब्दकोश और डोमेन विशिष्ट सुविधाओं को निकाला, भावना तीव्रता की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए पर्यवेक्षित मशीन लर्निंग एल्गोरिदम को अपनाया।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár n-aighneachtaí do thasc SemEval 2018 1. Tá tionchar ag an tasc ar thuar déine i tweets, lena n-áirítear cúig fhothasc. Ghlacamar páirt i ngach fothasc de thíoga Béarla. Bhaineamar roinnt NLP traidisiúnta, foclóir meon, foclóir mothúcháin agus gnéithe sainiúla fearainn as tweets, ghlacamar le halgartaim meaisínfhoghlama maoirsithe chun déine na mothúchán a thuar.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 feladatához szükséges beadványainkat. A feladat a tweetek intenzitásának előrejelzése, amely öt altevékenységet tartalmaz. Részt vettünk az angol tweetek összes alcsoportjában. Számos hagyományos NLP, érzelmi lexikon, érzelmi lexikon és domain specifikus funkciót kivontunk tweetekből, felügyelt gépi tanulási algoritmusokat alkalmaztunk az érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzésére.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუნტი ჩვენი წარმოდგენების სამუშაო 2018 სამუშაო დავაწერა 1. პარამეტრები იქნება ინტენსტიური წარმოდგენების შესახებ Tweets-ში, ანუ ხუთი წარმოდგენების შესახებ. ჩვენ ყველა ინგლისური ტვიტების საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი დავწყოთ. ჩვენ ვიქნებეთ რამდენიმე ტრადიციონალური NLP, სენტიმენტური ლექსიკონი, ემოციონალური ლექსიკონი და დემონის განსაკუთრებული ფუნქციები Tweets-დან, დავიწყენეთ მაქინის სწავ', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τις υποβολές μας στο έργο 1. Η εργασία είναι η πρόβλεψη έντασης επιρροής σε tweets, συμπεριλαμβανομένων πέντε δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Συμμετείχαμε σε όλες τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες των Αγγλικών tweets. Εξαγάλαμε αρκετά παραδοσιακά λεξικό συναισθημάτων, λεξικό συναισθημάτων και συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά από τα tweets, υιοθετήσαμε εποπτευόμενους αλγόριθμους μηχανικής μάθησης για να εκτελέσουμε πρόβλεψη έντασης συναισθημάτων.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinami mūsų pranešimai apie 2018 m. SemEval užduotį 1. The task is affect intensity prediction in tweets, including five subtasks.  We participated in all subtasks of English tweets.  Iš tweetų ištraukėme keletą tradicinių NLP, jausmų leksikono, emocijų leksikono ir dominio specifinių savybių, priėmėme prižiūrimus mašininio mokymosi algoritmus, kad atliktume emocijos intensyvumo prognozę.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive i nostri contributi al compito 1 di SemEval 2018. L'attività consiste nella previsione dell'intensità dei tweet, incluse cinque sottoattività. Abbiamo partecipato a tutte le sottoattività dei tweet inglesi. Abbiamo estratto diversi PNL tradizionali, lessico sentimentale, lessico emotivo e caratteristiche specifiche del dominio da tweet, adottato algoritmi di apprendimento automatico supervisionati per eseguire la previsione dell'intensità emotiva.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың 1- ші тапсырманың SemEval- ге жіберімізді таңдайды. Тапсырма тапсырманың тәртіпсіздігін таңдау үшін бес суретті қосып тұрады. Біз ағылшын тійтерінің барлық суреттеріне қатысу керек. Біз бірнеше әдеттегі NLP, сезімдік лексиканы, емоциялық лексиканы және домендің қасиеттерін tweets-тен алып тастадық. Эмоциялық қанықтығын бақылау үшін машинаны үйрену алгоритмдерін қолдандық', 'mk': 'Овој весник ги опишува нашите предлози на SemEval 2018 задача 1. Оваа задача влијае на предвидувањето на интензитетот на твитовите, вклучувајќи пет потпрашања. Учествувавме на сите потпрашања на англиски твитови. Извадивме неколку традиционални НЛП, лексикон за чувства, лексикон за емоции и специфични карактеристики на доменот од твитови, усвоивме алгоритми за машинско учење со надгледување за да извршиме предвидување на емоционалната интензитет.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjonijiet tagħna lil SemEval 2018 kompitu 1. Il-kompitu huwa li jaffettwa t-tbassir tal-intensità fit-tweets, inklużi ħames sottomistoqsijiet. Parteċipajna fis-sottomistoqsijiet kollha ta’ tweets Ingliżi. Estrattejna diversi NLP tradizzjonali, lexicon tas-sentimenti, lexicon tal-emozzjonijiet u karatteristiċi speċifiċi tad-dominju minn tweets, adottaw algoritmi superviżi tat-tagħlim tal-magni biex iwettqu tbassir tal-intensità tal-emozzjonijiet.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan penghantaran kita ke SemEval 2018 tugas 1. Tugas ini mempengaruhi ramalan intensiti dalam tweet, termasuk lima sub-tanya. Kami berpartisipasi dalam semua subtasks dari tweet Inggeris. Kami mengekstrak beberapa NLP tradisional, leksikon perasaan, leksikon emosi dan ciri-ciri domain khusus dari tweet, mengadopsi algoritma pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi untuk melaksanakan ramalan intensiti emosi.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ജോലി 1-ന് ഞങ്ങളുടെ കീഴടങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോലി ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d അഞ്ച് സബ്ട്ടാസുകളില്\u200d ഉള്ള പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ബാധിക്കുന്നതാണ്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ എല്ലാ ഉപാധികളിലും പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d പല പാരമ്പര്യമായ NLP, വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d, വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d, ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രത്യേക വിശിഷ്ടമുള്ള വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെ', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie înscrierile noastre la sarcina SemEval 2018 1. Sarcina este predicția intensității afectării în tweet-uri, inclusiv cinci subactivități. Am participat la toate subactivitățile tweeturilor în limba engleză. Am extras mai multe caracteristici tradiționale PNL, lexicon sentiment, lexicon emoțional și domeniu specific din tweet-uri, am adoptat algoritmi supravegheați de învățare automată pentru a efectua predicția intensității emoțiilor.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2018 оны SemEval-ын 1 даалгаврыг тайлбарладаг. Тайлбар нь таван сурагчид хамааралтай tweets дээр хүндрэлтэй таамаглалтай байдлаар нөлөөлдөг. Бид Англи хэлний tweets дээр оролцсон. Бид олон уламжлалт НLP, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн лексикон, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн лексикон, tweets-ээс тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтуудыг авч, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчирхийллийн таамаглалтын тулд машины суралцах ал', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke na zadatak 1. Taj zadatak utiče na predviđanje intenziteta u tweets, uključujući pet podataka. Mi smo sudjelovali u svim podupicama engleskih tweets. Izvukli smo nekoliko tradicionalnih NLP-a, leksiona sentimenta, emocionalnog leksiona i specifičnih karakteristika domena iz tweeta, usvojili algoritme nadzornog mašinskog učenja kako bi izvršili predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver våre tillegg til semiEval 2018 oppgåve 1. Oppgåva påvirkar forhåndsvising av intensitet i tweets, inkludert fem underspørsmål. Vi delta på alle underspørsmål av engelske tweets. Vi ekstraherte fleire tradisjonelle NLP, sentimentleksikon, emosjonell leksikon og domenespesifikke funksjonar frå tweets, adopterte algoritme for å lære maskinen for å utføra følelsesintensitet.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සෙම්වල් 2018 කාර්ය 1 වලට පිළිගන්නවා. මේ වැඩේ ට්විට්ට් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පහත් වලින්. අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් වල සියළුම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන සම්බන්ධ වුනා. අපි සාමාන්\u200dය NLP වලින්, දැනුම් ලෙක්සිකෝන්, දැනුම් ලෙක්සිකෝන් හා ඩොමේන් විශේෂ අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් ටිවිට් වලින්, පරික්ෂා', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasze zgłoszenia do zadania SemEval 2018 1. Zadaniem jest przewidywanie intensywności wpływu w tweetach, w tym pięć podzadań. Uczestniczyliśmy we wszystkich podzadaniach angielskich tweetów. Wyodrębniliśmy kilka tradycyjnych funkcji NLP, leksykon sentymentów, leksykon emocji i specyficzne cechy domeny z tweetów, przyjęliśmy nadzorowane algorytmy uczenia maszynowego do przewidywania intensywności emocji.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaa ku qoran warqaddayada loo soo diro SemEval 2018 shaqo 1. The task is affect intensity prediction in tweets, including five subtasks.  Waxaannu ka qeybqaadanay shaqooyin kasta oo ah tweetka Ingiriiska. Waxaannu Tweetka ka soo bixinnay qaar ka mid ah NLP, xisaabta leksikarka, xisaabta leksikarka iyo deegaanka oo gaar ah, waxaana loo soo bandhigay qoraalka wax barashada maskaxda oo la ilaaliyey si loo sameeyo wax u sii sheego xisaabta.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் SemEval 2018 பணிக்கு எங்கள் கட்டளைகளை விவரிக்கிறது. The task is affect intensity prediction in tweets, including five subtasks.  நாங்கள் ஆங்கிலத்தின் அனைத்து துணை பணிகளில் பங்கிட்டோம். நாங்கள் சில மரபார்ந்த NLP, உணர்வு லெக்சியன், உணர்வு லெக்சிக்சியன் மற்றும் களத்திலிருந்து குறிப்பிட்ட சில குணங்களை வெளியேற்றினோம், உணர்வு', 'ur': 'This paper describes our submissions to SemEval 2018 task 1. یہ کام ٹویٹوں میں تیز کی پیش بینی پر تأثیر دیتا ہے، پانچ سٹسٹسٹ کے ساتھ۔ ہم انگلیسی ٹویٹ کے تمام سپٹسٹوں میں شریک ہوئے۔ ہم نے بہت سی سنتی NLP، احساسات لکسون، احساسات لکسون اور ڈومین کو ٹویٹوں سے خاص ویژہ بنایا تھا، مشین یادہانی الگوریٹم کو مضبوط بنایا تھا کہ احساسات شدت کی پیش بینی کرے۔', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver våra bidrag till SemEval 2018 uppgift 1. Uppgiften är att påverka intensitetsförutsägelse i tweets, inklusive fem underaktiviteter. Vi deltog i alla underuppgifter i engelska tweets. Vi extraherade flera traditionella NLP, sentimentlexikon, känslolexikon och domänspecifika funktioner från tweets, antog övervakade maskininlärningsalgoritmer för att utföra prediktion av känslointensitet.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval 2018 vazifa 1 ga ishonchimizni aytadi. Bu vazifa Twitterdan eng intensity taqdimot va besh vazifalar bilan ishlab chiqaradi. Biz Ingliz Twitterlarining hamma vazifalarini o'rgangan. Biz bir necha oddiy NLP, sentimetsiya leksikani, hissiyotning leksisini va domen xabarlardan foydalanib, hissiyotni eng tezlik qilish uchun bir necha tashkilotlarni olib tashladik.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả thông tin của chúng tôi cho nhiệm vụ SemEvol 11. Nhiệm vụ là tiên đoán mức độ tiêu chuẩn trên Twitter, gồm năm phần phụ đề. Chúng tôi tham gia tất cả các phần nhỏ của tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi rút ra vài thuật to án học máy truyền thống, ngôn ngữ đa cảm, ngôn ngữ xúc và miền đặc trưng từ Twitter, sử dụng các thuật toán học thiết bị giám sát để thực hiện dự đoán độ mạnh cảm xúc.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft onze inzendingen aan SemEval 2018 taak 1. De taak is het voorspellen van de beïnvloedintensiteit in tweets, inclusief vijf subtaken. We hebben deelgenomen aan alle subtaken van Engelse tweets. We hebben verschillende traditionele NLP, sentiment lexicon, emotie lexicon en domeinspecifieke functies uit tweets geëxtraheerd, en gebruikten supervised machine learning algoritmes om emotie intensiteit voorspelling uit te voeren.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашите предложения към задача 1. Задачата е прогнозиране на интензивността на въздействието в туитове, включително пет подзадачи. Участвахме във всички подзадачи на английски туитове. Извадихме няколко традиционни НЛП, сантиментален лексикон, емоционален лексикон и специфични за домейна функции от туитове, приехме контролирани алгоритми за машинно обучение за извършване на предсказване на интензивността на емоциите.', 'hr': 'Ovaj novinar opisuje naše podatke zadatku 1 za SemEval 2018. Taj zadatak utječe na predviđanje intenzitete u tweets, uključujući pet podataka. Učestvovali smo u svim podupiranjima engleskih tweets. Izvukli smo nekoliko tradicionalnih NLP-a, leksikona osjećaja, emocionalne leksikone i specifičnih karakteristika domena iz tweets, usvojili algoritme nadzornog učenja strojeva kako bi izvršili predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores indlæg til SemEval 2018 opgave 1. Opgaven er at påvirke intensitetsforudsigelse i tweets, herunder fem underopgaver. Vi deltog i alle underopgaver af engelske tweets. Vi udpakkede flere traditionelle NLP, sentiment leksikon, emotion leksikon og domænespecifikke funktioner fra tweets, vedtog overvågede maskinlæringsalgoritmer til at udføre følelsesintensitetsforudsigelse.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt unsere Beiträge zur SemEval 2018 Aufgabe 1. Die Aufgabe ist die Vorhersage der Affektintensität in Tweets, einschließlich fünf Teilaufgaben. Wir haben an allen Teilaufgaben englischer Tweets teilgenommen. Wir extrahierten mehrere traditionelle NLP, Sentiment Lexikon, Emotion Lexikon und domänenspezifische Funktionen aus Tweets und übernahmen überwachte Algorithmen für maschinelles Lernen, um die Emotionsintensität vorherzusagen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan pengiriman kita ke SemEval 2018 tugas 1. Tugas adalah mempengaruhi prediksi intensitas dalam tweet, termasuk lima subtasks. Kami berpartisipasi dalam semua subtasks dari tweet Inggris. Kami mengekstrak beberapa NLP tradisional, lexikon sentimen, lexikon emosi dan karakteristik domain spesifik dari tweet, mengadopsi algoritma pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi untuk melakukan prediksi intensitas emosi.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تحویل\u200cهای ما را به وظیفه\u200cی نیم\u200cEval ۲۰۱۸ توصیف می\u200cکند. این وظیفه تأثیر پیش بینی شدت در توئیت است، شامل پنج زیر سؤال. ما در تمامی زیر سوال\u200cهای tweets انگلیسی شرکت کردیم. ما چندتا الگوریتم یادگیری ماشین تحت نظر گرفتیم تا پیش بینی شدت احساسات را انجام دهیم.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaelezea ujumbe wetu wa SemEval 2018 kazi 1. Kazi hii inaathiri kutabiri kwa kiwango kikubwa katika twiti, ikiwa ni pamoja na kazi tano. Tumeshiriki katika kazi zote za twita za Kiingereza. Tumetoa baadhi ya utamaduni wa NLP, hisia za lexico, lexico za hisia na maeneo maalum kutoka kwenye twiti, zilizochukuliwa na miundo mbinu ya kujifunza kwa hisia ili kutekeleza utabiri mkubwa wa hisia.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2018 퀘스트 1에 제출한 서류를 소개한다.이 임무는 다섯 개의 임무를 포함한 추문에서 정서의 강도를 예측하는 것이다.우리는 영어 추문의 모든 하위 임무에 참여했다.우리는 트윗에서 몇 가지 전통적인 NLP, 감정어휘, 감정어휘와 특정 분야의 특징을 추출하여 감독이 있는 기계학습 알고리즘을 이용하여 감정의 강도를 예측했다.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier beskryf ons onderskrywings na SemEval 2018 taak 1. Die taak beïnvloor intensiteit voorskou in tweets, insluitend vyf subtaske. Ons het gedeel in alle subtaske van Engels tweets. Ons het verskeie tradisionele NLP, sentimentele leksikon, emosie leksikon en domein spesifieke funksies van tweets uitgevoer, die algoritme van masjien leer aangeneem om emosie intensiteit voorskou te doen.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan paraqitjet tona në SemEval 2018 detyrën 1. Detyra është të ndikojë parashikimin e intensitetit në tweet, duke përfshirë pesë nënpyetje. Ne morëm pjesë në të gjitha nënpyetjet e tweeteve angleze. Ne nxjerrim disa NLP tradicionale, lexikon e ndjenjave, lexikon e emocioneve dhe karakteristika specifike të dominit nga tweetet, miratuam algoritme të mbikqyrura për mësimin e makinave për të kryer parashikimin e intensitetit të emocioneve.', 'am': 'ይህች ገጽ ለሴmEval 2018 ስራ 1 የደረጃችንን አዋጅ ይናገራል፡፡ ስራው በትዊተሮች፣ አምስት ደብዳቤዎችን በመስጠት ላይ የሚቃወም ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ እንግሊዘኛ በትዊተሮች ሁሉ ተጋሪዎች ነበርን፡፡ ብዙ ባሕላዊ NLP፣ ስሜት ሌክሲን፣ ስሜት ሌክሲኮን እና ዶሜን የተለየ ጥያቄዎችን ከTwitter አወጣን፣ የተጠበቀው መሣሪያዎች የሚያስተምሩትን አሌጎሪትምን ለመፍጠር የተዘጋጀን እና የስሜት ጉዳይ ለመፍጠር ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň rugsatymyzy SemEval 2018-nji görevimizi 1-nji sany tassyklaýar. Bu zady tweetlerde gaty güýçli tahmin etmäge täsirleýär. Biz Iňlisçe tweetlerin ähli soraglaryna chikanchasdyk. Biz birnäçe däpli Däpli NLP, duýgular leksiýany, duýgular leksiýany we tweets-den beýleki özellikleri açdyk, duýgular agyrlamak üçin gözetli maşynyň öwrenmesi algoritmalaryny kabul etdik.', 'hy': 'This paper describes our submissions to SemEval 2018 task 1.  Այս խնդիրը ազդում է թվիթերի ինտենսիվության կանխատեսման վրա, ներառյալ հինգ ենթահարցեր: Մենք մասնակցեցինք անգլերենի թվիթերի բոլոր ենթահարցերին: Մենք վերցրեցինք մի քանի ավանդական ՆԼՊ-ներ, զգացմունքների լեքսիկոն, զգացմունքների լեքսիկոն և բնագավառների հատուկ հատկություններ թվիթերից, ընդունեցինք մեքենային ուսումնասիրության վերահսկված ալգորիթմներ զգացմունքների ինտենսի', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজের প্রতি আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া বর্ণনা করেছে। The task is affect intensity prediction in tweets, including five subtasks.  আমরা ইংরেজী টুইটের সকল সাবটাকাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছি। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি ঐতিহ্যবাহী এনএলপি, অনুভূতিপূর্ণ লেক্সিকোন, আবেগ লেক্সিকোর এবং ডোমেইনের টুইট থেকে নির্দিষ্ট বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য বিষয়গুলো বের করে', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje naše příspěvky k úkolu 1 SemEval 2018. Úkolem je predikce intenzity vlivu ve tweetech, včetně pěti podúkolů. Podíleli jsme se na všech podúkolech anglických tweetů. Z tweetů jsme extrahovali několik tradičních NLP, sentimentový lexikon, emoční lexikon a doménově specifické funkce, přijali algoritmy strojového učení pod dohledem k predikci intenzity emocí.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu les nostres presentacions a SemEval 2018 tasca 1. La tasca és afectar la predicció de la intensitat en els tweets, incloent cinc subtaskes. Vam participar en totes les subterrànies dels tweets anglesos. Vam extreure diverses característiques tradicionals de NLP, lexicó de sentiment, lexicó emocional i domini específics de tweets, vam adoptar algoritmes d'aprenentatge màquina supervisads per a fer predicció de l'intensitat emocional.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval işinə göndərilənlərimizi təsbiq edir. Bu işin, beş dəstək olaraq twetlərdə şiddətli təxminə təsir edir. Biz İngilis tweetlərin bütün subtasklarına katıldıq. NLP, sentiment leksikonu, emosyon leksikonu və domain özlərini tweetlərdən çıxartdıq. Gözlənmiş maşın öyrənməsi algoritmi qəbul etdik ki, emosyon şiddəti tədbirli etmək üçün.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan ehdotuksia SemEval 2018 tehtävään 1. Tehtävänä on vaikuttaa voimakkuuteen tweeteissä, mukaan lukien viisi alitehtävää. Osallistuimme kaikkiin englanninkielisten twiittien alatehtäviin. Poistimme tweeteistä useita perinteisiä NLP:tä, tunnesanastoa, tunnesanastoa ja toimialueen spesifisiä ominaisuuksia, otimme käyttöön valvottuja koneoppimisalgoritmeja tunteiden voimakkuuden ennustamiseksi.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie ettepanekuid SemEval 2018 ülesandele 1. Ülesanne on mõjutada intensiivsuse prognoosimine säutsudes, sealhulgas viis alamülesannet. Me osalesime kõigis inglise säutsude alamülesannetes. Me ekstraheerisime säutsudest mitmeid traditsioonilisi NLP-i, sentimentaalse leksikoni, emotsioonilise leksikoni ja domeenispetsiifilisi funktsioone, võtsime vastu järelevalve masinõppe algoritme emotsioonide intensiivsuse prognoosimiseks.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke na zadatak 1. SemEval 2018. Taj zadatak utiče na predviđanje intenziteta u tweets, uključujući pet podataka. Učestvovali smo u svim poduzetnicima engleskih tweets. Izvukli smo nekoliko tradicionalnih NLP-a, leksiona osjećaja, emocionalne leksione i specifičnih karakteristika domena iz tweeta, usvojili algoritme nadzornog mašinskog učenja kako bi izvršili predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing dipunangé awakdhéwé kanggo rerambangé awakdhéwé nang seminval 8. task Awak dhéwé ngerti kabèh tanggal nggambar tarjamahan kanggo tuwit Inggris We extract plural Traditional NLP, Sensitive Lelokiano, Sensitive Lelokiano karo domain kesempatan dhéwé, nggawe supokot manungsa Algorithms kuwi tindakan langgar tarjamahan ingkang dipenesihan.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naše prispevke k nalogi 1 SemEval 2018. Naloga je napoved intenzivnosti vpliva v tweetih, vključno s petimi podopravili. Sodelovali smo pri vseh podnalogah angleških tweetov. Iz tweetov smo izvlekli več tradicionalnih NLP, sentimentalnih leksikonov, emocijskih leksikonov in domenskih specifičnih funkcij, sprejeli nadzorovane algoritme strojnega učenja za napovedovanje intenzivnosti čustev.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את ההעברות שלנו לסימוול 2018 משימה 1. The task is affect intensity prediction in tweets, including five subtasks.  השתתפנו בכל השאלות של טוויטים אנגליים. הוצאנו מספר NLP מסורתיים, לקסיקון רגשות, לקסיקון רגשות ופרטים ספציפיים בתחום מטוויטים, אימצנו אלגוריתמים למידה מכונות שמבוטחים כדי לבצע חיזוי אינטנסיביות רגשות.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana misãlai zuwa Semeval 2018 aikin 1. Kayan aiki yana shawarar bayani masu ƙara cikin Twitter, tare da shan task õki. Mun yi mataimaka ga dukkan taskõki na Ingiriya. Ba mu sami wasu masu ƙayyade na NLP, ma'anar kwamfyuta, leksiya mai hisani da dukka, daga Twitter, kuma aka samo kodi masu karatun algoritori da za'a yi bayani ga kunyar hisani.", 'bo': 'ཤོག དྲ་ཐོག་གི་འགྲོ་སྣང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་འགོད་ཐེངས་ཕྱི་རྗེས་སུ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We extracted several traditional NLP, sentiment lexicon, emotion lexicon and domain specific features from tweets, adopted supervised machine learning algorithms to perform emotion intensity prediction.'}
{'en': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Predicting Affective Content in Tweets with Deep Attentive RNNs and Transfer Learning', 'ar': 'NTUA-SLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: توقع المحتوى المؤثر في التغريدات باستخدام RNNs اليقظة للغاية ونقل التعلم', 'pt': 'NTUA-SLP na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Prevendo Conteúdo Afetivo em Tweets com RNNs Atentos e Transferência de Aprendizagem', 'es': 'NTUA-SLP en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Predecir el contenido afectivo en los tuits con RNN profundamente atentos y transferir el aprendizaje', 'fr': 'NTUA-SLP à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Prédire le contenu affectif dans les tweets avec des RNN attentifs et un apprentissage par transfert', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のNTUA - SLPタスク1 ：深い注意を払ったRNNと転移学習を備えたツイートにおける感情的なコンテンツの予測', 'ru': 'NTUA-SLP на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Прогнозирование аффективного контента в твитах с глубоким вниманием RNN и передачей обучения', 'ga': 'NTUA-SLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Ábhar Taitneamhach a Thuar in Tweetanna le RNNanna Aireach domhain agus Foghlaim Aistrigh', 'zh': 'NTUA-SLP在SemEval-2018务1:用深RNN迁学推文之情', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर NTUA-SLP: गहरी चौकस RNNs और स्थानांतरण सीखने के साथ Tweets में भावात्मक सामग्री की भविष्यवाणी', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'NTUA-SLP a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Az érintett tartalom előrejelzése Tweetekben mélyreható RNN-ekkel és transzfertanulással', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Προβλέποντας Επιθετικό Περιεχόμενο σε Τουίτερ με Βαθιά Προσοχή και Μάθηση Μεταφοράς', 'it': 'NTUA-SLP a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Prevedere contenuti affettivi nei tweet con RNN profondi e Transfer Learning', 'mk': 'NTUA-SLP на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Предвидување на влијателна содржина на твитови со длабоко пристрасни РНН и пренесување', 'kk': 'NTUA- SLP жарым- 2018 тапсырманың 1- тапсырмасында: Твиттерде эффективті мазмұнын қарау үшін түсті нақты RNN және трансферт оқыту', 'lt': 'NTUA-SLP per 2018 m. pusmetį 1 užduotis: Poveikio turinio Tweetuose su giliai aktyviais RNR ir perkėlimo mokymosi prognozė', 'ms': 'NTUA-SLP pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Prediksi Kandungan Afektif dalam Tweets dengan RNN Attentive Deep and Transfer Learning', 'mt': 'NTUA-SLP f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Tbassir ta’ Kontenut Affettiv fit-Tweets b’RNNs Attentivi Profondi u Tagħlim ta’ Trasferiment', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1- ല്\u200d NTUA- SLP: ആഴത്തിലുള്ള ഉള്ളടക്കത്തില്\u200d ആഫ്ഫിക്റ്റീവ് ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിന്റെ മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു', 'mn': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Predicting Effective Content in Tweets with Deep Attentive RNN and Transfer Learning', 'no': 'NTUA-SLP på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Foreventar effektiv innhald i tweeter med dypt attentive RNN og overføringslæring', 'pl': 'NTUA-SLP w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Przewidywanie treści afektywnych w tweetach z głębokimi uważnymi RNN i transfer learning', 'ro': 'NTUA-SLP la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Predicția conținutului afectiv în Tweets cu RNN-uri atente profunde și transfer de învățare', 'sr': 'NTUA-SLP na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: predviđanje efektivnog sadržaja u Tweets sa dubokim pozornim RNN-ima i učenjem prijenosa', 'si': 'NTUA-SLP at Halfeval-2018 Job 1: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ට්විට්ස් වල ගොඩක් අවධාන RNN සහ Transfer Training', 'so': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Predicting Affective Content in Tweets with Deep Attentive RNNs and Transfer Learning', 'sv': 'NTUA-SLP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Att förutsäga affektivt innehåll i Tweets med djupt uppmärksam RNN och Transfer Learning', 'ur': 'NTUA-SLP نصف-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں: ٹویٹوں میں اثرات منصوبت کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے جو عمیق اثرات RNN اور ترنسفور سیکھنے کے ساتھ', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் NTUA- SLP 1: ஆழம் Attention RNNs மற்றும் மாற்று கற்றுக்கொண்டு கட்டுப்படுத்தல் ஆழமான உள்ளடக்கத்தை முன்னேற்றுகிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'NTUA-SLP ở Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8: định giá nội dung tác động trong Tweet bằng RNN Deep Attentive và truyền giáo', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Прогнозиране на афективното съдържание в Tweets с дълбоко внимание и трансферно обучение', 'nl': "NTUA-SLP bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Het voorspellen van Affectieve Content in Tweets met Deep Attentieve RNN's en Transfer Learning", 'hr': 'NTUA-SLP na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 1: predviđanje efektivnog sadržaja u Tweets sa dubokim pozornim RNN-ima i učenjem prijenosa', 'da': "NTUA-SLP på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Forudsigelse af påvirket indhold i Tweets med dybt opmærksomme RNN'er og Transfer Learning", 'fa': 'NTUA', 'ko': 'NTUA-SLP가SemEval-18에서의 임무1: RNN에 대한 깊은 관심과 이동 학습을 통해 트위터의 감정 내용을 예측한다', 'id': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Predicting Affective Content in Tweets with Deep Attentive RNNs and Transfer Learning', 'af': 'NTUA- SLP by SemEval- 2018 Taak 1: Voorskou Affektiewe Inhoud in Tweets met Deep Aangaande RNN en Oordrag Leer', 'tr': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affective Content in Tweets with Deep Attentive RNNs and Transfer Learning', 'sw': 'NTUA-SLP katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Kujiandaa Maudhui yenye ufanisi katika Twita na Ujumbe wa NNN na Ufunzi wa Uhamiaji', 'sq': 'NTUA-SLP në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Prediktimi i përmbajtjes ndikuese në Tweets me RNN të thella dhe mësim transferimi', 'de': 'NTUA-SLP bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Vorhersage von affektiven Inhalten in Tweets mit Deep Attentive RNNs und Transfer Learning', 'am': 'ስራ 1: Predicting Affective Content in Tweets with Deep Attentive RNNs and Transfer Learn', 'hy': 'ՆԹՈԱ-ՍԼՊ-ը, 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի առաջին հանձնարարում. Անֆեկտիվ պարունակության կանխատեսումը թվիթերում, որոնք ունեն խորը ուշադրություն դարձնող ՌՆՆ-ներ և փոխանցման ուսումնասիրություն', 'az': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Deep Attentive RNN and Transfer Learning in Tweets', 'bs': 'NTUA-SLP na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: predviđanje efektivnog sadržaja u Tweets sa dubokim pozornim RNN-ima i učenjem prijenosa', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১-এ NTUA-SLP: গভীর অ্যাটেন্টিভিভ আর ট্রান্সফার্নার শিক্ষা দিয়ে টুইটে আফ্রিকেটিভ বিষয়বস্তু প্রস্তুত করছে', 'ca': 'NTUA-SLP a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Predicting Affective Content in Tweets with Deep Attentive RNN and Transfer Learning', 'cs': 'NTUA-SLP na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Predikce efektivního obsahu ve tweetech s hlubokou pozorností RNN a transfer učení', 'et': 'NTUA-SLP SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Affektiivse sisu prognoosimine Tweetides sügava tähelepanuväärse RNN-iga ja siirdeõppega', 'fi': 'NTUA-SLP SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Affektiivisen sisällön ennustaminen tweeteissä syvän tarkkaavaisen RNN:n ja siirtooppimisen avulla', 'he': 'NTUA-SLP ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: Predicting Affective Content in Tweets with Deep Attentive RNNs and Transfer Learning', 'jv': 'For Word Wrap Around', 'sk': 'NTUA-SLP na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Napovedovanje afektivne vsebine v tweetih z globokimi pozornimi RNN-ji in prenosnim učenjem', 'ha': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 1: Predicting Affective Content in Twitter with Depth AttAttAttent RNNs and Transverse Learn', 'bo': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Predicting Affective Content in Tweets with Deep Attentive RNNs and Transfer Learning'}
{'en': 'In this paper we present deep-learning models that submitted to the SemEval-2018 Task 1 competition : Affect in Tweets. We participated in all subtasks for English tweets. We propose a Bi-LSTM architecture equipped with a multi-layer self attention mechanism. The attention mechanism improves the model performance and allows us to identify salient words in tweets, as well as gain insight into the models making them more interpretable. Our model utilizes a set of word2vec word embeddings trained on a large collection of 550 million Twitter messages, augmented by a set of word affective features. Due to the limited amount of task-specific training data, we opted for a transfer learning approach by pretraining the Bi-LSTMs on the dataset of Semeval 2017, Task 4A. The proposed approach ranked 1st in Subtask E Multi-Label Emotion Classification, 2nd in Subtask A Emotion Intensity Regression and achieved competitive results in other subtasks.', 'ar': 'نقدم في هذه الورقة نماذج التعلم العميق التي تم تقديمها إلى مسابقة SemEval-2018 Task 1: "Affect in Twitter". شاركنا في جميع المهام الفرعية للتغريدات الإنجليزية. نقترح بنية Bi-LSTM مجهزة بآلية متعددة الطبقات للانتباه الذاتي. تعمل آلية الانتباه على تحسين أداء النموذج وتسمح لنا بتحديد الكلمات البارزة في التغريدات ، فضلاً عن اكتساب نظرة ثاقبة للنماذج مما يجعلها أكثر قابلية للتفسير. يستخدم نموذجنا مجموعة من حفلات الزفاف بالكلمة word2vec المُدرَّبة على مجموعة كبيرة من 550 مليون رسالة Twitter ، مدعومة بمجموعة من السمات المؤثرة بالكلمات. نظرًا للكمية المحدودة من بيانات التدريب الخاصة بالمهمة ، اخترنا نهج تعلم النقل من خلال التدريب المسبق لـ Bi-LSTMs على مجموعة بيانات Semeval 2017 ، المهمة 4A. حصل النهج المقترح على المرتبة الأولى في المهمة الفرعية E "تصنيف العاطفة متعدد الملصقات" ، والمرتبة الثانية في المهمة الفرعية أ "انحدار كثافة العاطفة" وحققت نتائج تنافسية في المهام الفرعية الأخرى.', 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval -2018タスク1コンペティション「ツイートに影響を与える」に提出されたディープラーニングモデルを紹介します。私たちは英語のツイートのすべてのサブタスクに参加しました。多層自己注目機構を備えたBi - LSTMアーキテクチャを提案します。注意メカニズムは、モデルのパフォーマンスを向上させ、ツイートの中の顕著な単語を特定し、モデルをより解釈しやすくするための洞察を得ることができます。当社のモデルは、5億5000万のTwitterメッセージの大規模なコレクションでトレーニングされたWord 2 vecワード埋め込みのセットを利用しており、一連のワードの感情的な機能によって拡張されています。タスク固有のトレーニングデータの量が限られているため、私たちはSemeval 2017, Task 4 Aのデータセット上のBi - LSTMを事前にトレーニングすることにより、転送学習アプローチを選択しました。提案されたアプローチは、サブタスクE「マルチラベル感情分類」で1位、サブタスクA「感情強度回帰」で2位となり、他のサブタスクで競争的な結果を達成した。', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons des modèles d'apprentissage profond soumis au concours SEMEVAL-2018 Task 1\xa0: «\xa0Affect in Tweets\xa0». Nous avons participé à toutes les tâches subordonnées pour les tweets en anglais. Nous proposons une architecture bi-LSTM équipée d'un mécanisme d'auto-attention multicouche. Le mécanisme d'attention améliore les performances du modèle et nous permet d'identifier les mots saillants dans les tweets, ainsi que d'obtenir un aperçu des modèles qui les rendent plus interprétables. Notre modèle utilise un ensemble d'intégrations de mots word2vec formées sur une vaste collection de 550 millions de messages Twitter, augmentées par un ensemble de fonctionnalités affectives de mots. En raison de la quantité limitée de données de formation spécifiques aux tâches, nous avons opté pour une approche d'apprentissage par transfert en préentraînant les Bi-LSTMS sur l'ensemble de données de Semeval 2017, tâche 4A. L'approche proposée s'est classée première dans la sous-tâche E «\xa0Classification des émotions en plusieurs étiquettes\xa0», 2e dans la sous-tâche A «\xa0Régression de l'intensité des émotions\xa0» et a obtenu des résultats compétitifs dans d'autres sous-tâches.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo apresentamos modelos de deep learning submetidos ao concurso SemEval-2018 Task 1: “Affect in Tweets”. Participamos de todas as subtarefas de tweets em inglês. Propomos uma arquitetura Bi-LSTM equipada com um mecanismo de autoatenção multicamadas. O mecanismo de atenção melhora o desempenho do modelo e nos permite identificar palavras salientes em tweets, bem como obter insights sobre os modelos tornando-os mais interpretáveis. Nosso modelo utiliza um conjunto de incorporações de palavras word2vec treinadas em uma grande coleção de 550 milhões de mensagens do Twitter, aumentadas por um conjunto de recursos afetivos de palavras. Devido à quantidade limitada de dados de treinamento específicos de tarefas, optamos por uma abordagem de aprendizado de transferência pré-treinando os Bi-LSTMs no conjunto de dados de Semeval 2017, Tarefa 4A. A abordagem proposta ficou em 1º lugar na Subtarefa E “Multi-Label Emotion Classification”, 2º na Subtarefa A “Emotion Intensity Regression” e obteve resultados competitivos em outras subtarefas.', 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos los modelos de aprendizaje profundo que se presentaron a la competencia Tarea 1 de SemeVal-2018: «Affect in Tweets». Participamos en todas las subtareas de los tuits en inglés. Proponemos una arquitectura Bi-LSTM equipada con un mecanismo de autoatención multicapa. El mecanismo de atención mejora el rendimiento del modelo y nos permite identificar las palabras más destacadas en los tuits, así como obtener información sobre los modelos, haciéndolos más interpretables. Nuestro modelo utiliza un conjunto de incrustaciones de palabras word2vec entrenadas en una gran colección de 550 millones de mensajes de Twitter, aumentados por un conjunto de características afectivas de palabras. Debido a la cantidad limitada de datos de capacitación específicos de la tarea, optamos por un enfoque de aprendizaje de transferencia mediante la capacitación previa de los BI-LSTMS en el conjunto de datos de Semeval 2017, Tarea 4A. El enfoque propuesto ocupó el primer lugar en la subtarea E «Clasificación de emociones multietiqueta», el segundo en la subtarea A «Regresión de la intensidad de las emociones» y logró resultados competitivos en otras subtareas.', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем модели глубокого обучения, которые были представлены на конкурс Задача 1 SemEval-2018: «Влияние в твитах». Мы участвовали во всех подзадачах для английских твитов. Мы предлагаем архитектуру Bi-LSTM, оснащенную многослойным механизмом самовнимания. Механизм внимания улучшает производительность модели и позволяет идентифицировать характерные слова в твитах, а также получить представление о моделях, делая их более интерпретируемыми. Наша модель использует набор словесных вложений word2vec, обученных на большой коллекции из 550 миллионов сообщений Twitter, дополненных набором словесных аффективных функций. В связи с ограниченным объемом данных обучения по конкретным задачам, мы выбрали подход к обучению переносу, предварительно обучив Bi-LSTMs на наборе данных Semeval 2017, Task 4A. Предлагаемый подход занял 1-е место в подзадаче Е «Многоуровневая классификация эмоций», 2-е место в подзадаче А «Регрессия интенсивности эмоций» и достиг конкурентных результатов в других подзадачах.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair múnlaí domhainfhoghlama a chuir isteach ar chomórtas Tasc 1 SemEval-2018: “Affect in Tweets”. Ghlacamar páirt i ngach fothasc le haghaidh tweets Béarla. Molaimid ailtireacht Dé-LSTM atá feistithe le meicníocht féinairdithe ilchiseal. Feabhsaíonn an mheicníocht aird ar fheidhmíocht na samhla agus ligeann dúinn focail shuntasacha a aithint i dtvuíteanna, chomh maith le léargas a fháil ar na samhlacha, rud a fhágann go mbeidh siad níos inmhínithe. Úsáideann ár múnla sraith de leabú focal word2vec oilte ar bhailiúchán mór de 550 milliún teachtaireachtaí Twitter, méadaithe ag sraith de ghnéithe mothúcháin focal. Mar gheall ar an méid teoranta sonraí oiliúna a bhaineann go sonrach le tasc, roghnaigh muid cur chuige foghlama aistrithe trí réamhoiliúint a chur ar na Bi-LSTManna ar thacar sonraí Semeval 2017, Tasc 4A. Tháinig an cur chuige molta sa 1ú háit i bhFothasc E “Aicmiú Mothúcháin Illipéid”, 2ú háit i bhFothasc A “Aischéimniú ar Dhéine Mothúcháin” agus bhain sé amach torthaí iomaíocha i bhfothascanna eile.', 'zh': '在本文中,我们介绍了提交给SemEval-2018 Task 1竞赛的深度学习模样:"推文中的影响"。 吾与英语推文之所有也。 请备数自机Bi-LSTM架构。 谨察其能,使知推文之奇单词,深知其更具可解释性。 吾侪因word2vec以销之,其词嵌于5.5亿条Twitter消息之大集,因单词情而增之。 特定数有限,择迁徙之法,法在Semeval 2017,Task 4A之数集上预习Bi-LSTM。 在子职E多标情类为第一,在子职A"情强归"为第二,而于诸子取竞争性成。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम गहरी सीखने के मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो SemEval-2018 टास्क 1 प्रतियोगिता में प्रस्तुत किए गए हैं: "ट्वीट्स में प्रभाव"। हम अंग्रेजी tweets के लिए सभी subtasks में भाग लिया. हम एक द्वि-एलएसटीएम आर्किटेक्चर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक बहु-परत आत्म-ध्यान तंत्र से सुसज्जित है। ध्यान तंत्र मॉडल के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है और हमें ट्वीट्स में मुख्य शब्दों की पहचान करने की अनुमति देता है, साथ ही साथ मॉडल में अंतर्दृष्टि प्राप्त करता है जिससे उन्हें अधिक व्याख्यायोग्य बनाया जा सकता है। हमारा मॉडल word2vec शब्द embeddings के एक सेट का उपयोग करता है जो 550 मिलियन ट्विटर संदेशों के एक बड़े संग्रह पर प्रशिक्षित होता है, जो शब्द भावात्मक सुविधाओं के एक सेट द्वारा संवर्धित होता है। कार्य-विशिष्ट प्रशिक्षण डेटा की सीमित मात्रा के कारण, हमने सेमेवल 2017, टास्क 4 ए के डेटासेट पर द्वि-एलएसटीएम को प्रीट्रेन करके एक हस्तांतरण सीखने के दृष्टिकोण का विकल्प चुना। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण Subtask E "Multi-Label Emotion Classification" में 1 स्थान पर है, Subtask A "Emotion Intensity Regression" में 2nd है और अन्य subtasks में प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त किए हैं।', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ძალიან სწავლებელი მოდელები, რომლებიც SemEval-2018-ის კონტენეციაში გადატანა 1-ი დავალების კონტენეციაში: "შემდეგ ჩვენ ყველა ინგლისური ტივიტების საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი დავწყებდით. ჩვენ მინდომათ ბი-LSTM არქიტექტიკას, რომელიც მრავალური თავისუფლიო მექანიზმისთვის გამოყენებული. მოდინარების მექანსიმა მოდელის გამოსახულებას უფრო მეტადებს და ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავიდენოთ სულიან სიტყვები ტივიტებში, და მოდელის შესახებ უფრო მეტად განახულება. ჩვენი მოდელი გამოიყენება სიტყვას 2vec სიტყვას სიტყვას, რომლებიც 550 მილიონის Twitter შეტყობინებების დიდი კოლექციაში განაკეთებულია, რომლებიც სიტყვების შესაძლებლობებით აზ სამუშაო მონაცემების განსაკუთრებული მონაცემების შესახებ, ჩვენ მონიშნეთ მონაცემების გასწავლებელი გასწავლებელი პროგრამის შესახებ, რომელიც BI-LSTMs მონაცემების გასწავლა პროგრამების პროგრამა 1-ში "მრავალური ელემოციის კლასიფიკაცია", 2-ში "ელემოციის ინტენსტიური რეგრესია" და სხვა ქვემოსტაციის კონპექტიური შედეგები მიიღეთ.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk azokat a mélytanulási modelleket, amelyeket a SemEval-2018 Task 1 pályázatra jelentettek be: "Affect in Tweets". Részt vettünk az angol tweetek összes részfeladatában. A Bi-LSTM architektúra többrétegű önfigyelő mechanizmussal felszerelt. A figyelem mechanizmusa javítja a modell teljesítményét és lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy felismerjük a kiemelkedő szavakat a tweetekben, valamint betekintést nyerjünk a modellekbe, amelyek értelmezhetőbbek legyenek. Modellünk egy sor word2vec szóbeágyazást használ, amelyet 550 millió Twitter üzenetből álló nagy gyűjteményre készítettünk, és kiegészítve szó affektív funkciókkal. A feladatspecifikus képzési adatok korlátozott mennyisége miatt transzfertanulási megközelítést választottunk a Semeval 2017, feladat 4A adatkészletén található Bi-LSTM-ek előkészítésével. A javasolt megközelítés az "E" alcsoportban az első helyezett, az "A" alcsoportban a második helyezett, és versenyképes eredményeket ért el más alcsoportban.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης που υποβλήθηκαν στον διαγωνισμό εργασίας 1: "Επίδραση στα tweets". Συμμετείχαμε σε όλες τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες για τα Αγγλικά tweets. Προτείνουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική εξοπλισμένη με πολυστρωματικό μηχανισμό αυτοπροσοχής. Ο μηχανισμός προσοχής βελτιώνει την απόδοση του μοντέλου και μας επιτρέπει να εντοπίσουμε σημαντικές λέξεις στα tweets, καθώς και να αποκτήσουμε γνώση των μοντέλων καθιστώντας τα πιο ερμηνευτικά. Το μοντέλο μας χρησιμοποιεί ένα σύνολο ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων που εκπαιδεύονται σε μια μεγάλη συλλογή 550 εκατομμυρίων μηνυμάτων που ενισχύονται από ένα σύνολο συναισθηματικών χαρακτηριστικών λέξεων. Λόγω του περιορισμένου ποσού των δεδομένων κατάρτισης που αφορούν συγκεκριμένες εργασίες, επιλέξαμε μια προσέγγιση μάθησης μεταφοράς με προεπιλογή των Bi-LSTMs στο σύνολο δεδομένων του Semeval 2017, Task 4A. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση κατατάχθηκε 1η στην Υποεργασία Ε "Ταξινόμηση Συναισθηματικών Πολλαπλών ετικετών", 2η στην Υποεργασία Α "Μεταστροφή Έντασης Συναισθηματισμού" και πέτυχε ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα σε άλλες δευτερεύουσες εργασίες.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo modelli di deep learning presentati al concorso SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. Abbiamo partecipato a tutte le sottorichieste per i tweet in inglese. Proponiamo un'architettura Bi-LSTM dotata di un meccanismo di auto attenzione multistrato. Il meccanismo di attenzione migliora le prestazioni del modello e ci permette di identificare parole salienti nei tweet, così come di acquisire una visione dei modelli rendendoli più interpretabili. Il nostro modello utilizza un insieme di embedding word2vec di parole addestrati su una vasta collezione di 550 milioni di messaggi Twitter, aumentati da una serie di funzioni affettive di parola. A causa della quantità limitata di dati formativi specifici per attività, abbiamo optato per un approccio di transfer learning predisponendo i Bi-LSTMs sul set di dati di Semeval 2017, Task 4A. L'approccio proposto si è classificato 1 ° nella sottomissione E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', 2 ° nella sottomissione A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' e ha ottenuto risultati competitivi in altre sottoattività.", 'mk': 'Во овој документ претставуваме модели за длабоко учење кои се поднесоа на натпреварот SemEval-2018 Task 1: „Влијание на твитови“. Учествувавме на сите потпрашања за англиски твитови. Предложуваме архитектура на Би-ЛСТМ опремена со механизам на повеќе слоеви за себе внимание. Механизмот на внимание ја подобрува резултатот на моделот и ни овозможува да идентификуваме значајни зборови на твитовите, како и да добиеме информација за моделите што ги прави поинтерпретабилни. Нашиот модел користи сет на зборови вградени во зборови word2vec тренирани на голема колекција од 550 милиони Твитер пораки, зголемени од сет на зборови влијателни карактеристики. Поради ограничената количина на податоци за обука специфични за задачите, избравме пристап на трансферентно учење со претренирање на Би-ЛСТМ на податоците од Северниот 2017 година, задача 4А. Предложениот пристап се рангираше на првата во подзадачата Е „Класификација на емоции со повеќе ознаки“, на втората во подзадачата А „Регресија на емоционска интензитет“ и постигна конкурентни резултати во другите подзадачи.', 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan model belajar dalam yang dihantar kepada persaingan SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. Kami berpartisipasi dalam semua sub-tanya untuk tweet Inggeris. Kami cadangkan arkitektur Bi-LSTM yang dilengkapi dengan mekanisme perhatian diri berbilang lapisan. Mekanisme perhatian meningkatkan prestasi model dan membolehkan kita mengenalpasti perkataan yang penting dalam tweet, serta mendapatkan pandangan ke dalam model yang membuat mereka lebih boleh diterjemahkan. Model kami menggunakan set pembenaman kata word2vec dilatih pada koleksi besar 550 juta mesej Twitter, ditambah oleh set ciri-ciri perkataan yang affectif. Kerana jumlah data latihan khusus tugas, kami memilih pendekatan pembelajaran pemindahan dengan melatih Bi-LSTM pada set data Semeval 2017, Tugas 4A. Pendekatan yang diusulkan ditangkap pertama dalam Subtugas E 'Klasifikasi Emosi Label-berbilang', kedua dalam Subtugas A 'Regresi Intensiti Emosi' dan mencapai keputusan kompetitif dalam subtugas lain.", 'mt': "F'dan id-dokument nippreżentaw mudelli ta' tagħlim profond li tressqu lill-kompetizzjoni SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affett in Tweets'. Parteċipajna fis-sottotalbiet kollha għal tweets bl-Ingliż. Aħna nipproponu arkitettura Bi-LSTM mgħammra b’mekkaniżmu ta’ awtonomija b’diversi saffi. Il-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-mudell u jippermettilna nidentifikaw kliem importanti fit-tweets, kif ukoll jiksbu għarfien dwar il-mudelli li jagħmluhom aktar interpretabbli. Il-mudell tagħna juża sett ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem word2vec imħarrġa fuq ġabra kbira ta’ 550 miljun messaġġ Twitter, miżjuda b’sett ta’ karatteristiċi affetttivi tal-kliem. Minħabba l-ammont limitat ta’ dejta dwar it-taħriġ speċifiku għall-kompiti, għa żlna approċċ ta’ tagħlim tat-trasferiment billi nħarrġu minn qabel il-Bi-LSTMs fuq is-sett ta’ dejta tas-Semeval 2017, Kompitu 4A. L-approċċ propost kellu l-ewwel klassifikazzjoni fis-Subkompitu E 'Klassifikazzjoni tal-Emożizzjoni b'Tikketti Multi', it-tieni fis-Subkompitu A 'Regressjoni tal-Intensità tal-Emożizzjoni' u kiseb riżultati kompetittivi f'sottokompiti oħra.", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 1 പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്നു: “ടൂട ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എല്ലാ സബ്ടേജുകളിലും പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബി-എല്\u200dസ്റ്റം ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റര്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു multi-layer സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സ് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മെനിസ്റ്റം മാതൃകയുടെ പ്രകടനത്തില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ടൂട്ടില്\u200d കഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറി നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു വാര്\u200dഡ്2വെക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. 550 മില്ല്യന്\u200d ടൂട്ടര്\u200d സന്ദേശങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗ ജോലിക്കുള്ള പ്രത്യേക പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കാരണം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മാറ്റം പഠിക്കാനുള്ള വഴിയില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്തു. സെമെവാല്\u200d 2017-ലെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ്  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആദ്യത്തെ സുബ്ബട്ടില്\u200d 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', രണ്ടാമത്തെ സുബ്ബട്ടില്\u200d 'Emotion Intensity Regression' നിര്\u200dബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തി മറ്റു സബ്ട്ടേഷ", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2018 Task 1-ийн өрсөлдөөнд "Tweets-д нөлөөлөх нөлөөлөх" загварыг суралцах загваруудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид Англи хэлний tweets дээр оролцсон. Бид Би-ЛСТМ архитектурыг олон давхар өөрийн анхаарлын механизмтай зохион байгуулсан. Анхаарлын механизм загварын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж, бидэнд tweets дээр сайхан үгсийг тодорхойлох боломжтой болгодог. Мөн загваруудыг илүү ойлгох боломжтой болгодог. Бидний загварын загвар нь 550 сая Твиттерийн хуудас дээр сургалтын хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэлбэрийг ашиглаж байна. Бид ажлын тодорхой сургалт өгөгдлийн хязгаарлагдмал хэмжээний учраас бид 2017 оны дундаж зуун зуун зуун үеийн Би-ЛСТМ-г, Task 4A-ын өгөгдлийн сан дээр шилжүүлэх арга замыг сонгосон. Тайлбарласан арга баримт 1-р "Олон-найралтын Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл Классификацийн Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл Хүйцэтгэл" 2', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome išsamaus mokymosi modelius, kurie buvo pateikti konkursui „Poveikis Tweetuose“ 1 užduoties puslapyje 2018 m. Mes dalyvavome visuose paklausimuose apie anglų tweetus. Siūlome dviejų sluoksnių savarankiško dėmesio mechanizmą. The attention mechanism improves the model performance and allows us to identify salient words in tweets, as well as gain insight into the models making them more interpretable.  Mūsų modelis naudoja žodžių 2vec įdėjimų rinkinį, apmokytą didelėje 550 milijonų Twitter pranešimų rinkinyje, papildytą žodžių įtakingų savybių rinkiniu. Atsižvelgdami į ribotą konkrečioms užduotims skirtų mokymo duomenų kiekį, nusprendėme taikyti mokymosi perdavimu metodą iš anksto parengdami dviejų LSTM programų 2017 m. pusmečio duomenų rinkinį, 4A užduotis. Siūlomas metodas pirmą kartą priskirtas E pakopos „Daugiaženklių emocijų klasifikavimui“, antrą – A pakopos „Emocijų intensyvumo regresijai“ ir pasiekė konkurencinius rezultatus kitose pakopose.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз біз бірінші тапсырма "Твиттерге әсер ету" деген жарықтық оқыту үлгілерін таңдаймыз. Біз ағылшынша tweets үшін барлық суреттерге қатынасыз. Біз бірнеше қабатты өзіңіздің өзіңіздің өзіңіздің бірнеше қабатты архитектурасының Bi-LSTM архитектурасын ұсынамыз. Бақылау механизмі үлгіліктерді жақсартып, тейтеттерде теңіздік сөздерді анықтауға мүмкіндік береді, сондай-ақ үлгілерді қолдануға болады. Біздің үлгіміз 550 миллион Твиттер хаттардың үлкен жинақтағы сөздерді 2vec сөздерді ендіру жинағын қолданады. Бұл сөздерді әсер етпейтін мүмкіндіктері бойынша көптеген. Тапсырманың ерекше оқыту деректерінің шектелген мөлшерлері себебі, біз 2017 жылдың жарым-жылдық тапсырма 4A тапсырмасындағы Bi-LSTMs деректер жиынына ауыстыру жағдайын таңдадық. Бұл тапсырма "Көп жарлық күй- жарлық күй- жарлық күй- жарлық классификациясы" 1- інде, 2- тапсырма "Күй- жарлық күй- жарлық регрессиясы" 2- інде, басқа жарлық күй- жарлы', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi dype læringsmodeller som sendte til sammenheng med semiEval-2018 Oppgåve 1: "Etter tweets". Vi delta i alle underspørjingar om engelske tweets. Vi foreslår ein bi-LSTM-arkitektur med ein fleire lag selvstyrkemekanisme. Merknadsmekanismenyen forbedrar modellen og tillater oss å identifisera salient ord i tweets, og få innsyning i modelane som gjer dei meir tolkbare. Modellen vårt bruker eit sett med ord 2vec- innbygging som treng på eit stor samling av 550 millioner Twitter- meldingar, som blir auka av eit sett ord- effektiv funksjonar. På grunn av begrenset mengda oppgåvespesifikke opplæringsdata, valte vi ein tilnærming for å lære overføringar ved å trekke Bi-LSTMs på datasettet i halvåld 2017, oppgåve 4A. Den foreslåde tilnærminga rangerte 1 i underoppgåva E «Multi-Label Emotion Classification», 2 i underoppgåva A «Emotion Intensity Regression», og oppnådd konkurrentiv resultat i andre underoppgåver.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy modele głębokiego uczenia, które zgłosiły się do konkursu SemEval-2018 Task 1: "Affect in Tweets". Uczestniczyliśmy we wszystkich podzadaniach dotyczących angielskich tweetów. Proponujemy architekturę Bi-LSTM wyposażoną w wielowarstwowy mechanizm samoobserwacji. Mechanizm uwagi poprawia wydajność modelu i pozwala nam zidentyfikować istotne słowa w tweetach, a także uzyskać wgląd w modele, dzięki czemu są one bardziej interpretowalne. Nasz model wykorzystuje zestaw osadzeń słów Word2vec przeszkolonych na dużej kolekcji 550 milionów wiadomości na Twitterze, rozszerzonych o zestaw funkcji afektywnych słów. Ze względu na ograniczoną ilość danych szkoleniowych specyficznych dla zadania, zdecydowaliśmy się na transfer learning poprzez wstępne szkolenie Bi-LSTMs na zbiorze danych Semeval 2017, Zadanie 4A. Proponowane podejście zajęło pierwsze miejsce w podzadaniu E "Klasyfikacja emocji wieloznakowych", drugie w podzadaniu A "Regresja intensywności emocji" i osiągnęło konkurencyjne wyniki w innych podzadaniach.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm modele de învățare profundă care au participat la concursul SemEval-2018 Task 1: "Afect in Tweets". Am participat la toate subactivitățile pentru tweeturile în limba engleză. Propunem o arhitectură Bi-LSTM echipată cu un mecanism de auto-atenție multistrat. Mecanismul de atenție îmbunătățește performanța modelului și ne permite să identificăm cuvinte importante în tweet-uri, precum și să obținem o perspectivă asupra modelelor făcându-le mai interpretabile. Modelul nostru utilizează un set de încorporări word2vec de cuvinte instruite pe o colecție mare de 550 de milioane de mesaje Twitter, amplificate de un set de caracteristici afective de cuvinte. Datorită cantității limitate de date de instruire specifice sarcinilor, am optat pentru o abordare de transfer learning prin pregătirea Bi-LSTMs pe setul de date Semeval 2017, Task 4A. Abordarea propusă s-a clasat pe locul 1 în Subsarcina E "Clasificarea emoțiilor cu etichete multiple", pe locul 2 în Subsarcina A "Regresia intensității emoționale" și a obținut rezultate competitive în alte subsarcini.', 'sr': "U ovom papiru predstavljamo modele dubokog učenja koji su predali natjecanju na prvom zadatku u polu Evala-2018: 'Posluživanje Tweets'. Mi smo sudjelovali u svim podpitanjima za engleske tweets. Predlažemo arhitekturu bi-LSTM opremljenu mehanizam pažnje na višeslojevima. Mehanizam pažnje poboljšava modelnu funkciju i omogućava nam da identifikujemo saliène reèi u tweetovima, kao i da dobijemo uvid u modele koji ih čine interpretabilnijim. Naš model koristi setu rečenica 2vec rečenica obučenih na velikoj kolekciji 550 miliona tviterskih poruka, povećanoj sa setom rečenih utjecaja. Zbog ograničene količine podataka o obuci određenih zadataka, odabrali smo pristup prijenosnoj učenju, pretvarajući bi-LSTMs na setu podataka poluvekova 2017., zadatak 4A. Predloženi pristup je bio prvi u subtask E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', drugi u podzadatku A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' i ostvario konkurentne rezultate u drugim podkazama.", 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපි ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒ වගේම සේම්වල් 2018 කාර්ය 1 ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් පෙන්වන්නේ: 'ට අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් එක්ක සියළුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා. අපි බී-ල්ස්ටිම් ස්ථාපනයක් ප්\u200dරසිද්ධා කරනවා වඩා ස්ථාපනයක් තියෙන්නේ. අවධානය පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණය වැඩි කරනවා ඒ වගේම අපිට ට්විට් වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම මොඩේල් ව අපේ මොඩල් භාවිතා කරනවා වචන 2වෙක් වචන ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් සූදානයක් තියෙනවා ට්විටර් මිලියන 550 සංකේතනයේ ලොකු සංකේතනයක්  වැඩක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරධාන දත්තේ සීමාවිත විශේෂ විශේෂ විදිහට, අපි තෝරාගත්තා බී-LSTMs විදිහට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරධානයක් විදි ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට පළවෙනි විදිහට සුබ් විදිහට E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classication', 2 විදිහට සුබ් විදිහට A 'Emotion Intensty regression' සහ අනිත් විදිහට", 'so': 'Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa modelal waxbarasho dheer ah oo loo dhiibay tartanka 1-shaqo ee SemEval-2018: "Wax saameyn ku leh Tweets". Waxaannu ka qeybqaadanay shaqooyin kasta oo ku saabsan tweetka Ingiriiska. Bi-LSTM waxaan soo jeedaynaa dhismo ay leedahay meymisyo aad u fiirsan karto. Meherka daryeelka ayaa horumarinaya sameynta modelalka, wuxuuna inagu ogolaan karaa inaannu aqoonsanno hadalka sameynta ee tweetka, sidoo kale aragtida sameynta oo ka sameynaya in ay turjumaan. Tusaale ahaan wuxuu isticmaalaa hadal 2vec ah oo lagu baray urur badan oo farriin badan oo 550 milyan oo Twitter ah, oo lagu kordhiyey xarumo hadal saameyn ah. Sababta aad u xadan waxbarashada shaqo oo gaar ah ayaannu u doorannay habka waxbarashada la wareejiyo, iyadoo aan ka hor dhignay Bi-LSTMs oo ku qoran taariikhda danbiyada Semeval 2017, shaqo 4A. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday waxay ka soo baxay 1st ee Sub-task E \'Fiisashada qalabka badan\', 2nd in Subtask A \'Emotion Intensity Regression\' waxayna gaadheen sabab tartank ah oo ay ka helaan shaqaalaha kale.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi djupinlärningsmodeller som anmälts till SemEval-2018 Task 1-tävlingen: "Påverkan i tweets". Vi deltog i alla underuppdrag för engelska tweets. Vi föreslår en Bi-LSTM arkitektur utrustad med en flerlagers självuppmärksamhetsmekanism. Uppmärksamhetsmekanismen förbättrar modellens prestanda och gör det möjligt för oss att identifiera viktiga ord i tweets, samt få insikt i modellerna som gör dem mer tolkningsbara. Vår modell använder en uppsättning word2vec ord inbäddningar utbildade på en stor samling av 550 miljoner Twitter-meddelanden, förstärkta av en uppsättning ord affektiva funktioner. På grund av den begränsade mängden uppgiftsspecifika utbildningsdata valde vi en överföringsinlärningsmetod genom att förbereda Bi-LSTMs på datauppsättningen för Semeval 2017, Task 4A. Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet rankades 1:a i underuppgift E \'Multi-Label Emotion Classification\', 2:a i underuppgift A \'Emotion Intensity Regression\' och uppnådde konkurrenskraftiga resultat i andra underuppgifter.', 'ur': "اس کاغذ میں ہم عمیق سیکھنے کی موڈل پیش کرتے ہیں جو نصف Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۱ کی مسابقه پر پیش کیا گیا تھا: Tweets میں اثر ہے۔ ہم انگلیسی ٹویٹ کے لئے تمام سپٹسٹوں میں شریک ہوئے۔ ہم ایک Bi-LSTM معماری پیشنهاد کریں جو ایک بہت سی لائر کی اظہار مکانیزم کے ساتھ مطابق ہے. توئیٹوں میں صاف کلمات پہچان دینے کی اجازت دیتا ہے اور مدلکوں میں بھی زیادہ تفسیر کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے۔ ہمارا مدل ایک زبان 2vec word embeddings کا مجموعہ استعمال کرتا ہے جو 550 میلیون ٹویٹر پیغام کے بڑے مجموعہ پر آموزش کی گئی ہے، جو ایک زبان کے ذریعہ اضافہ کرتی ہے۔ ہم نے دنیا کی تعلیم کے مقدار کے باعث ایک ترنس سیکھنے کی طریقہ کے لئے انتخاب کیا تھا، اس کے ذریعہ ہم نے ۲۰۱۷، ٹاکس 4A کے ڈاٹ سٹ پر Bi-LSTMs کو ترنس سیکھنے کے لئے انتخاب کیا تھا. پیغمبر کی تقریبا ایک مرتبہ ہے Subtask E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification' میں، دوسرے مطابق A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' میں اور دوسرے مطابق میں مقابلہ کے نتائج پہنچ گئے۔", 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் மாதிரிகளை கொண்டுள்ளோம் செம்வால்-2018 செயல் 1 வேலைக்கு கொடுக்கப்பட் நாங்கள் ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு அனைத்து உப பணிகளிலும் பங்கிட்டோம். நாம் பல அடுக்கு தன்னை கவனத்திற்கு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு பி எல்ஸ்டிஎம் அமைப்பை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். கவனம் முறைமை மாதிரி செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் தேவையான வார்த்தைகளை தெரிந்து கொள்ள அனுமதிக்கிறது, மாதிரிகளில்  எங்கள் மாதிரி வார்த்தை 2வெக் வார்த்தையை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, 550 மில்லியன் தொடர்பு செய்திகளில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, சொல்லும் பாத செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சியின் குறிப்பிட்ட அளவு காரணத்தால், நாங்கள் மாற்று கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறையை தேர்ந்தெடுத்தோம் செம்வால் 2017-ல்  துணை செயலில் முதல் முறை வரையறுக்கப்பட்டது 'பல- சிட்டி உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தல்', உப செயலில் A 'உணர்வு உணர்வு உணர்வு கடினம்' மற்றும் பொருத்தும் முடிவுகள் மற", 'uz': "In this paper we present deep-learning models that submitted to the SemEval-2018 Task 1 competition: 'Affect in Tweets'.  Biz ingliz tilida hamma sub-vazifalarga murojaat qildik. Biz ko'plab-darajada o'zimni o'zimga tayyorlangan Bi-LSTM struktureni tasavvur qilamiz. Muhimlik mekaniya model bajarishni o'zgartiradi va bizni Twitterda soʻzlarni aniqlashga ruxsat beradi, va modellarga ko'rsatish mumkin. Bizning modelimiz 550 million Twitter xabarlarining katta тўпланган soʻzlardan foydalanadi. Bu so'zlar tashkilotga qo'llangan imkoniyatlarni qo'yish mumkin. Vazifaning qanchalik taʼminlovchi maʼlumotning chegarasi sabab, biz Vazifa 4A (Semeval 2017) haqida Bi-LSTMs maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'zgartirish muvaffaqiyatlarini o'zgartirish usulini tanlashimiz mumkin. Tashkilot E 'Multi-lab xabarlarning birinchi darajasi' bilan birinchi darajaga kiritildi, ikkinchi vazifani 'Emotion Intensity Regression' bilan boshqa vazifaning rivojlanish natijalariga yetardi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu các mô hình học sâu được gửi đến cuộc thi Nhiệm vụ SemEvol-208: "tác động trên Tweet". Chúng tôi tham gia tất cả các thư ngầm về tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi đề nghị một kiến trúc hai-LSTM được trang bị với cơ chế tự chú ý nhiều lớp. Các cơ chế chú ý cải thiện hiệu ứng mô hình và cho phép chúng ta xác định những từ nổi tiếng trên Twitter, cũng như có được sự hiểu biết về các mô hình khiến chúng dễ hiểu hơn. Người mẫu của chúng tôi sử dụng một tập hợp từ ngữ 2vector từ mới được huấn luyện trên một tập hợp gồm một triệu tập tin Twitter, được tăng thêm bởi một loạt các tính năng tác động từ. Do lượng nhỏ các dữ liệu về huấn luyện đặc nhiệm, chúng tôi đã chọn phương pháp học chuyển nhượng, bằng cách đoán trước các tập tin Bi-LSTM trên tập tin thuộc Semeval Des7, Task 4A. Cách tiếp cận được đề xuất thứ nhất theo phân loại E\'đa nhãn để mê hoặc\', thứ hai theo nền trừ A\'Thuyết phục độ mạnh cảm xúc\'và đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh trong các yêu cầu khác.', 'nl': "In dit artikel presenteren we deep-learning modellen die zijn ingediend voor de SemEval-2018 Taak 1 competitie: 'Affect in Tweets'. We hebben deelgenomen aan alle subtaken voor Engelse tweets. We stellen een Bi-LSTM architectuur voor die is uitgerust met een meerlaags zelfattentiemechanisme. Het aandachtsmechanisme verbetert de prestaties van het model en stelt ons in staat om opvallende woorden in tweets te identificeren, evenals inzicht te krijgen in de modellen waardoor ze beter interpreteerbaar worden. Ons model maakt gebruik van een set word2vec woord embeddings getraind op een grote verzameling van 550 miljoen Twitter berichten, aangevuld met een reeks woord affectieve functies. Vanwege de beperkte hoeveelheid taakspecifieke trainingsdata hebben we gekozen voor een transfer learning aanpak door de Bi-LSTMs vooraf te trainen op de dataset van Semeval 2017, Taak 4A. De voorgestelde aanpak scoorde 1e in Subtaak E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', 2e in Subtaak A 'Emotie Intensity Regressie' en behaalde concurrerende resultaten in andere subtaken.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме модели на дълбоко обучение, които се представиха в конкурса Задача 1: "Въздействие в туитове". Участвахме във всички подзадачи за английски туитове. Предлагаме архитектура, оборудвана с многослоен механизъм за самовнимание. Механизмът за внимание подобрява производителността на модела и ни позволява да идентифицираме видни думи в туитове, както и да придобием представа за моделите, което ги прави по-разбираеми. Нашият модел използва набор от вграждания на думи обучени върху голяма колекция от 550 милиона съобщения в Туитър, допълнени с набор от думи афективни функции. Поради ограниченото количество специфични за задачата данни за обучение, ние избрахме подход за трансферно обучение чрез предобучение на Би-ЛТМ върху набора от данни на задача 4А. Предложеният подход заема първо място в подзадача Е "Класификация на емоциите с много етикети", второ място в подзадача А "Регресия на интензивността на емоциите" и постига конкурентни резултати в други подзадачи.', 'da': "I denne artikel præsenterer vi deep learning modeller, der blev indsendt til SemEval-2018 Task 1 konkurrencen: 'Påfør i tweets'. Vi deltog i alle underopgaver til engelske tweets. Vi foreslår en Bi-LSTM arkitektur udstyret med en multi-lags selvopmærksomhedsmekanisme. Opmærksomhedsmekanismen forbedrer modellens ydeevne og giver os mulighed for at identificere fremtrædende ord i tweets, samt få indsigt i modellerne, der gør dem mere fortolkelige. Vores model bruger et sæt word2vec ord embeddings trænet på en stor samling af 550 millioner Twitter-beskeder, forstærket med et sæt ord affektive funktioner. På grund af den begrænsede mængde opgavespecifikke træningsdata valgte vi en transfer learning tilgang ved at forudtræne Bi-LSTMs på datasættet i Semeval 2017, Task 4A. Den foreslåede fremgangsmåde rangerede 1. i underopgave E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', 2. i underopgave A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' og opnåede konkurrencedygtige resultater i andre underopgaver.", 'de': "In diesem Beitrag stellen wir Deep-Learning-Modelle vor, die beim SemEval-2018 Task 1 Wettbewerb eingereicht wurden: 'Affect in Tweets'. Wir haben an allen Teilaufgaben für englische Tweets teilgenommen. Wir schlagen eine Bi-LSTM Architektur vor, die mit einem mehrschichtigen Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus ausgestattet ist. Der Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus verbessert die Modellleistung und ermöglicht es uns, wichtige Wörter in Tweets zu identifizieren, sowie Einblicke in die Modelle zu gewinnen, die sie besser interpretierbar machen. Unser Modell verwendet eine Reihe von Word2vec Wort Einbettungen trainiert auf einer großen Sammlung von 550 Millionen Twitter Nachrichten, ergänzt durch eine Reihe von Wort affektiven Funktionen. Aufgrund der begrenzten Menge an aufgabenspezifischen Trainingsdaten haben wir uns für einen Transfer Learning Ansatz entschieden, indem wir die Bi-LSTMs auf dem Datensatz von Semeval 2017, Task 4A vortrainierten. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz erreichte den ersten Platz in Teilaufgabe E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', zweiten Platz in Teilaufgabe A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' und erzielte wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse in anderen Teilaufgaben.", 'id': "Dalam kertas ini kami mempersembahkan model belajar dalam yang diserahkan ke kompetisi SemEval-2018 Task 1: 'Affect in Tweets'. We participated in all subtasks for English tweets.  Kami mengusulkan arsitektur Bi-LSTM yang disediakan dengan mekanisme perhatian diri multi-lapisan. The attention mechanism improves the model performance and allows us to identify salient words in tweets, as well as gain insight into the models making them more interpretable.  Model kami memanfaatkan set kata word2vec embedding dilatih pada koleksi besar 550 juta pesan Twitter, ditambah oleh set karakteristik kata yang affectif. Karena jumlah data latihan spesifik tugas terbatas, kami memilih pendekatan belajar transfer dengan melatih Bi-LSTM pada set data Semeval 2017, Task 4A. Pendekatan yang diusulkan rangka pertama dalam Subtask E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', kedua dalam Subtask A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' dan mencapai hasil kompetitif dalam Subtask lain.", 'hr': "U ovom papiru predstavljamo modele dubokog učenja koji su predali natjecanju za zadatak 1 iz polovine Evala-2018: 'utjecaja na Tweets'. Učestvovali smo u svim podpitanjima za engleske tweets. Predlažemo arhitekturu bi-LSTM-a opremljenu mehanizam višeslojnih samopouzdanja. Mehanizam pažnje poboljšava uspješnost modela i omogućava nam identificirati salične riječi u tweetima, kao i dobiti uvid u modele koji ih čine interpretabilnijim. Naš model koristi skup rečenica 2vec riječi obučenih na velikoj kolekciji 550 milijuna tviterskih poruka, povećanom skupom rečenih utjecaja. Zbog ograničene količine podataka o obuci određenih zadataka, odabrali smo pristup prijenosnom učenju pretvarajući bi-LSTMs na skupu podataka poluvječnog 2017. godine, zadatak 4A. Predloženi pristup je prvi u podzadatku E 'klasifikacija emocija višeoznačenih etiketa', drugi u podzadatku A 'Regresija intenzitete emocija' i ostvario konkurentne rezultate u drugim podizacima.", 'ko': "본고에서 우리는SemEval-18미션1대회에 제출한 심도 있는 학습 모델인'트위터의 영향'을 보여 주었다.우리는 영어 추문의 모든 하위 임무에 참여했다.다중 자가 주의 메커니즘을 갖춘 이중 LSTM 아키텍처를 제시했습니다.주의 메커니즘은 모델의 성능을 향상시켜 우리가 추문 중의 현저한 단어를 식별하고 모델을 깊이 있게 이해하여 이해하기 쉽게 한다.우리의 모델은 5억 5000만 개의 트위터 메시지를 포함하는 큰 집합에 삽입된word2vec 단어를 활용하여 하나의 단어의 감정적 특징을 강화했다.임무에 특정된 교육 데이터가 제한되어 있기 때문에 우리는 Semeval 2017 임무 4A의 데이터 집합에서 Bi LSTM을 미리 교육함으로써 이전 학습 방법을 선택했다.이 방법은 하위 퀘스트 E'다라벨 정서 분류'에서 1위, 하위 퀘스트 A'정서 강도 회귀'에서 2위를 차지하며 다른 하위 퀘스트에서 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었다.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما مدل یادگیری عمیق را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به مسابقه\u200cی مسابقه\u200cی نیم\u200cEval-2018 ارائه می\u200cشود: اثر در تویتها. ما در تمامی زیر خواسته\u200cهای tweets انگلیسی شرکت کردیم. ما یک معماری BILSTM را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با یک مکانیسم توجه به خودش بسیار لایه\u200cهای زیادی آماده شده است. مکانیسم توجه عملکرد مدل را بهتر می کند و به ما اجازه می دهد کلمات تسلیم را در تویت شناسایی کنیم، همچنین به مدل توجه کنیم که آنها را ترجمه بیشتری می کند. مدل ما یک مجموعه کلمه ۲vek کلمه استفاده می\u200cکند که در مجموعه\u200cی بزرگ ۵۵۰ میلیون پیام توئیتر آموزش داده شده است، که توسط مجموعه کلمه ویژه\u200cهای تاثیرگذاری شده است. به خاطر مقدار محدودیت داده های آموزش مشخص کار، ما برای یک روش آموزش انتقال انتقال انتقال را انتخاب کردیم با تحریک کردن دو-LSTMs در مجموعه داده های سنتی ۲۰۱۷، Task 4A. این دستور پیشنهاد اولین درجه در کلاس\u200cشناسی Emotion Multi-Label E است، دومین درجه در Subtask A «تغییر فشار احساسات» و نتیجه\u200cهای مسابقه\u200cای را در دیگر تحقیق یافت.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda çukur öwrenmek nusgalaryny SemEval-2018 Görev 1-nji ýaryşy tarapyna gönderýäris: 'Tweets içinde etkiler'. Biz iňlisçe tweets üçin ähli Subasklara goşuldyk. Biz birnäçe gaty bir özi üns meýdançasynda bi-LSTM arhitektura teklip edip görýäris. Diňleşme mekanismi nusgasyny gowurap ýöredýär we tweetlerde çykyş sözleri tanamagymyza mümkin edýär, we nusgalary has gowurak ýagdaýa düşürýär. Biziň nusgamyz 550 milyon Twitter mesajlarynda bilinmeli sözler guralýar. Beýik bir şekilde laýyk guralýan sözler bilen üýtgedýär Görevleriň azalty taýýarlama maglumaty üçin biz Bi-LSTMsleriň 2017-nji ýylyň yary sany çykyşynda, Görev 4A-nyň üstüne süýtgetmesi üçin bir hereket etdik. Subtask E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', 2-nji Subtask A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' tarafından birinci tarafından berildi ve diğer subtasklarda rekabetçi neticeleri başardı.", 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii tunaweka modeli za kujifunza kwa kina ambazo zilitoa kwenye mashindano ya SemEval-2018 ya kazi 1: “Inaathiri kwenye twita”. Tumeshiriki katika kazi zote za twita za Kiingereza. Tunazipendekeza ujenzi wa Bi-LSTM wenye uwezo wa mfumo wa kujisikiliza kwa ngazi nyingi. Mfumo wa ufuatiliaji unaboresha utendaji wa mifano na unaruhusu kututambua maneno mazungumzo katika twiti, pamoja na kupata uelewa wa mifano ili kuwafanya kuwa na ufafanuzi zaidi. Mfano wetu unatumia seti ya neno la Word2vec ambalo limefundishwa kwenye mkusanyiko mkubwa wa jumbe za Twita milioni 550, uliongezeka na seti ya maneno yanayoathiri. Kutokana na kiwango kikubwa cha taarifa za mafunzo maalum za kazi, tulichagua njia ya kuhamisha elimu kwa kuchelea Bi-LST kwenye seti ya taarifa za Semeval 2017, Kazi 4A. Mpango huu wa mapendekezo ulikuwa wa kwanza katika kazi ya Ujumbe wa E 'Kutangaza hisia za Kialama Multi-Label', wa pili katika kazi ya A 'Kuzuia Ujasiri wa Tamko' na kupata matokeo ya ushindani katika majukumu mengine.", 'af': "In hierdie papier laat ons diep-leer modele voorsien wat aan die semiEval-2018 taak 1-samenskap voorsien het: 'Afteken in Tweets'. Ons het gedeel in alle subtaske vir Engels tweets. Ons voorstel 'n Bi-LSTM-arkitektuur wat met 'n multi-laag self-aandag mekanisme beskikbaar is. Die aandagmekanisme verbeter die model prestasie en laat ons toe om salient woorde in tweets te identifiseer, en ook aandag te verkry in die modele wat hulle meer vertaling maak. Ons model gebruik 'n stel woorde 2vec woord inbêdings wat op 'n groot versameling van 550 miljoen Twitter boodskappe opgelei is, wat deur 'n stel woord effektiewe funksies vergroot is. Dus die beperkte hoeveelheid van taak-spesifieke onderwerking data, het ons opgekies vir 'n oordrag onderwerp onderwerp deur die Bi-LSTMs op die datastel van semievaal 2017, Opdrag 4A te trek. Die voorgestelde toegang het 1st in Subtask E 'Multi-Label Emotification Classification', 2nd in Subtask A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' gemaak en gemaak gemaakte resultate in ander subtaske.", 'sq': "In this paper we present deep-learning models that submitted to the SemEval-2018 Task 1 competition: 'Affect in Tweets'.  Ne morëm pjesë në të gjitha nënkërkesat për tweetet angleze. Ne propozojmë një arkitekturë Bi-LSTM të pajisur me një mekanizëm shumë-shtresa vetëvëmendje. Mekanizmi i vëmendjes përmirëson performancën e modelit dhe na lejon të identifikojmë fjalë të rëndësishme në tweet si dhe të fitojmë kuptim në modelet që i bëjnë ato më të interpretueshme. Modeli ynë përdor një sërë fjalë2vec të përfshira të stërvitura në një koleksion të madh prej 550 milion mesazhe Twitter, të shtuar nga një sërë fjalëafektive karakteristika. Për shkak të sasisë së kufizuar të të dhënave të trajnimit specifik për detyrat, zgjodhëm një metodë transferimi mësimi duke paratrajnuar Bi-LSTMs në grupin e të dhënave të Semeval 2017, Task 4A. Përqasja e propozuar u rendit e para në nëndetyrën E 'Klasifikimi i Emocioneve Multi-Label', e dyta në nëndetyrën A 'Regresioni i Intensitetit Emocional' dhe arriti rezultate konkurruese në nëndetyra të tjera.", 'bn': "এই কাগজটিতে আমরা গভীর শিক্ষার মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি যা সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজের প্রতিযোগিতায় জমা দিয়েছে “টুইটারে প্রভাব ফেলেছে ইংরেজি টুইটের জন্য আমরা সব সাবট্যাকাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছি। আমরা একটি বি-এলস্টিএম কাঠামোর প্রস্তাব করছি যা বহুস্তরের আত্মমনোযোগের মাধ্যমে। এই মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে মডেল প্রদর্শনের উন্নতি প্রদান করে এবং টুইটে আমাদের বেদনাদায়ক শব্দ চিহ্নিত করার সুযোগ দেয় এবং মডেলের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গ আমাদের মডেল ২ভেক শব্দ ব্যবহার করে বিশাল ৫৫০ মিলিয়ন টুইটার বার্তার সংগ্রহে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যা কিছু শব্দ প্রভাবিত বৈশিষ্ট্য দ্ কাজের নির্দিষ্ট প্রশিক্ষণের পরিমাণ সীমিত তথ্যের কারণে আমরা বিএলএসএমএস-এর ডাটাসেট ২০১৭ সেমেভেল ২০১৭ তারিখে কাজের ৪এ কাজে বিএলস্টিমে প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপ ইউ 'বহুল লেবেলের Emotion Classication', সাবটাবাস এ 'Emotion Intentioty Regression' দ্বিতীয় ভাবে প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে।", 'am': "በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ ለሳምEval-2018 ስራ 1 ተቃውሞ የሰጡት የጥልቅ ትምህርት ሞዴላዎችን እናቀርባታለን ‹በትዊተሮች ላይ ተግባር›› እንግሊዘኛ በትዊተሮች ላይ ሁሉን ደብዳቤዎችን ተጋጠመን:: በብዙ ደረጃዎች የራሳቸውን ማስታወቂያ አካባቢ-ኤልስቴም መሠረት እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የጥያቄ አካሄዱ ምሳሌ ድምፅን ያሳድጋል እና በጣቢያ ቃሎችን እና በዓይነቶች ላይ የሚተረጉማቸውን ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የቃላት 2vec ቃላት በቁጥጥር በሚያሳየው የ550 ሚሊዮን ትዊተር መልእክቶች ላይ የተሰራረበ ቃላት የሚታወቀውን የቃላት ቃላትን ይጠቅማል፡፡ በሥርዓት-ምርጫው ስርዓት አካባቢ-LSTMs በሳምቨርስቲ 2017 ዳታ ማድረጊያውን በመዘርጋት ለመለወጥ ጥያቄን መረጥነው፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት በ(Submission E) 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', ሁለተኛው በጉዳዩ A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' እና ለሌሎች ደብዳቤዎችን አግኝተዋል፡፡", 'ca': 'In this paper we present deep-learning models that submitted to the SemEval-2018 Task 1 competition: \'Affect in Tweets\'.  We participated in all subtasks for English tweets.  Proposem una arquitectura Bi-LSTM equipada amb un mecanisme d\'auto-atenció multicapa. The attention mechanism improves the model performance and allows us to identify salient words in tweets, as well as gain insight into the models making them more interpretable.  El nostre model utilitza un conjunt d\'incorporacions de paraules word2vec entrenats en una gran col·lecció de 550 milions de missatges Twitter, augmentats per un conjunt de característiques afectives de paraules. Gràcies a la quantitat limitada de dades d\'entrenament específics per a les tasques, vam optar per un enfocament d\'aprenentatge de transfer ència pré-entrenant els Bi-LSTMs en el conjunt de dades de Semeval 2017, tasca 4A. L\'enfocament proposat es va classificar en primer lloc a la Subtasca E "Classificació d\'emocions multietiquetades", en segon lloc a la Subtasca A "Regressió d\'intensitat emocional" i va aconseguir resultats competitius en altres subtaskes.', 'bs': "U ovom papiru predstavljamo modele dubokog učenja koji su predali natjecanju prvog zadatka u polovini Evala-2018: 'utjecaja na Tweets'. Mi smo sudjelovali u svim podupiranjima za engleske tweets. Predlažemo arhitekturu bi-LSTM opremljenu mehanizam samopouzdanja više slojeva. Mehanizam pažnje poboljšava modelnu funkciju i omogućava nam da identificiramo salične riječi u tweetima, kao i da dobijemo uvid u modele koji ih čine interpretabilnijim. Naš model koristi skup rečenica 2vec rečenica obučenih na velikoj kolekciji 550 milijuna tviterskih poruka, povećanom skupom rečenih utjecaja. Zbog ograničene količine podataka o obuci određenih zadataka, odabrali smo pristup prijenosnom učenju, pretvarajući bi-LSTMs na setu podataka poluvekova 2017., zadatak 4A. Predloženi pristup je prvi u podzadatku E 'klasifikacija emocija multi-etiketa', drugi u podzadatku A 'Regresija intenzitete emocija' i ostvario konkurentne rezultate u drugim podizanjima.", 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame sügavõppe mudeleid, mis esitasid SemEval-2018 Task 1 konkursile "Affect in Tweets". Osalesime kõigis inglise keele säutsude alamülesannetes. Pakume välja Bi-LSTM arhitektuuri, mis on varustatud mitmekihilise enesetähelepanu mehhanismiga. Tähelepanumehhanism parandab mudeli jõudlust ja võimaldab meil tuvastada säutsudes silmapaistvaid sõnu ning saada ülevaadet mudelitest, muutes need tõlgendatavamaks. Meie mudel kasutab Word2vec sõna manustamise komplekti, mis on koolitatud suure kogumi 550 miljonit Twitteri sõnumit, mida täiendavad sõna afektiivsed funktsioonid. Ülesandepõhiste koolitusandmete piiratud hulga tõttu valisime siirdeõppe lähenemisviisi, koolitades Bi-LSTMd Semeval 2017 ülesande 4A andmekogumil. Kavandatud lähenemisviis oli alaülesandes E "Multi-Label Emotion Classification" esimene, alaülesandes A "Emotion Intensity Regression" teine ja saavutas teistes alaülesannetes konkurentsivõimelised tulemused.', 'az': 'Bu kağıtda hal-2018 Öyrənməsi üçün "Tövtlərə müvafiq" göstərilən derin öyrənmə modellərini göstəririk. İngilizce tweets üçün bütün subtasklara katıldıq. Biz bir çoxlu-katlı self-attention mehanizmi ilə birləşdirilmiş bi-LSTM arhitektarını təklif edirik. Dikkat mehanizmisi modellərin performansını yaxşılaşdırır və bizə twetlərdə süslü sözləri tanıtmağı və modellərə daha çox çəkinməyə imkan verir. Bizim modellərimiz 550 milyon Twitter mesajlarının böyük koleksiyonunda təhsil edilmiş sözləri 2vec sözlərini istifadə edir. Bu sözləri təsirli fəaliyyətlərlə artırır. Gözəl müəyyən təhsil məlumatlarının sınırlı qiyməti üzündən, 2017-ci yarı əsrlərin, 4.A Gözəl təhsil qurmağı ilə bi-LSTMs\'lərin təhsil qurmasını təhsil etmək üçün seçdik. Önülləşdirilmiş tərzim, Subtask E \'Multi-Label Emotion Classification\', Subtask A \'Emotion Intensity Regression\' və başqa subtasklarda müharibə sonuçlarını başa düşdü.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään SemEval-2018 Task 1 -kilpailuun osallistuneita syväoppimisen malleja: "Affect in Tweets". Osallistuimme kaikkiin englanninkielisten twiittien alatehtäviin. Ehdotamme Bi-LSTM-arkkitehtuuria, jossa on monikerroksinen itsehoitomekanismi. Huomiomekanismi parantaa mallin suorituskykyä ja mahdollistaa sen, että voimme tunnistaa näkyviä sanoja tweeteissä sekä saada tietoa malleista tehden niistä ymmärrettävämpiä. Mallimme hyödyntää joukon word2vec-sanaupotuksia, jotka on koulutettu suurelle 550 miljoonan Twitter-viestin kokoelmalle, jota täydentää joukko sanaafektiivisia ominaisuuksia. Tehtäväkohtaisten koulutustietojen rajallisen määrän vuoksi valitsimme siirtooppimisen lähestymistavan esikouluttamalla Bi-LSTMs-harjoituksia Semeval 2017, Task 4A -aineistossa. Ehdotettu lähestymistapa sijoittui ensimmäiseksi osatehtävässä E "Multi-Label Emotion Classification", toiseksi osatehtävässä A "Emotion Intensity Regression" ja saavutti kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia muissa osatehtävissä.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme modely hlubokého učení, které byly předloženy do soutěže SemEval-2018 Task 1: \'Affect in Tweets\'. Podíleli jsme se na všech podúkolech pro anglické tweety. Navrhujeme architekturu Bi-LSTM vybavenou vícevrstvým mechanismem sebepozornosti. Mechanismus pozornosti zlepšuje výkon modelu a umožňuje identifikovat významná slova ve tweetech, stejně jako získat vhled do modelů, čímž jsou interpretovatelnější. Náš model využívá sadu vložení slov Word2vec trénované na velké sbírce 550 milionů Twitter zpráv, rozšířené o sadu slovních afektivních funkcí. Vzhledem k omezenému množství úkolově specifických tréninkových dat jsme se rozhodli pro přenosový přístup učení předškolením Bi-LSTMs na datové sadě Semeval 2017, Úkol 4A. Navržený přístup se zařadil na první místo v podúkolu E "Multi-Label Emotion Classification", na druhé v podúkolu A "Emotion Intensity Regression" a dosáhl konkurenčních výsledků v dalších podúkolech.', 'hy': "In this paper we present deep-learning models that submitted to the SemEval-2018 Task 1 competition: 'Affect in Tweets'.  Մենք մասնակցեցինք անգլերեն թվիթերի բոլոր ենթախնդիրներին: Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու-ԼՍԹՄ ճարտարապետություն, որն ունի բազմաշերտ եսի ուշադրության մեխանիզմ: Ուշադրության մեխանիզմը բարելավում է մոդելի արտադրողականությունը և թույլ է տալիս մեզ հնարավորություն տալ հնարավոր բառեր թվիթերում, ինչպես նաև հասկանալ մոդելները, որոնք դարձնում են դրանք ավելի թարգմանելի: Մեր մոդելը օգտագործում է մի շարք բառեր 2veք, որոնք պատրաստված են 550 միլիոն Թվիթերի հաղորդագրությունների մեծ հավաքածուի վրա, ավելացված բառերի ազդեցություն ունեցող հատկանիշներով: Որոշ խնդիրների մասնավոր ուսուցման տվյալների սահմանափակ քանակի պատճառով, մենք ընտրեցինք փոխանցման ուսուցման մոտեցում' նախապատրաստելով ԲիԼՍԹՄ-ները 2017 թվականի կիսադարյան, 4Ա-ի տվյալների համակարգի վրա: The proposed approach ranked 1st in Subtask E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', 2nd in Subtask A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' and achieved competitive results in other subtasks.", 'ha': 'Ga wannan takarda, Munã halatar da misãlai masu sanar da kewayi da aka saka zuwa al\'amarin na Semeval-2018: "Ina amfani da shi a cikin Twitter." Mun yi mataimaki ga dukkan taskõki na Ingiriya. Tuna goyyar da wani matsayin Bi-LSM wanda yana da wani matsayin muhalli na multi-daraja. Akamatarar muhalli na ƙari mafarin mazaɓa misalin kuma yana yarda mu iya gane magana masu sali a cikin Twitter, da kuma ka sami gane na misãlai da za\'a fassarar da su. Ana amfani da tsarin maganar 2viec da aka sanar da shi ga mai haɗa jumui masu juma 550 millions na Twitter, an ƙara wani set of words masu yin hushi. Ga da yakin tsarin aikin da aka ƙayyade data masu yin amfani da shi, muka zãɓe wa wata hanyarwa ta shige da wa\'azi a kanana kafin ta kafin ta bi-LSM kan danne-tsarin shekara 2017, Taimar 4A. Tsarin da aka buƙata ta ranked na farko a cikin Subaikin Eki \'Cirari ga Label Kuwo-Label\', na biyu a cikin Subaikin A \'Regression Intense Sura\'', 'jv': "Nang pepul iki, awak dhéwé iso nggawe model sing luwih-luwih dumaten sing isin mi-ne soko semebal-2013 task 1 dumatenan: 'AfEffect in Two'. Awak dhéwé ngejaraké kabèh basa kanggo tuwit Inggris We proposal a bi-SLT architecture device with a multi-layer Self Mind mehanical. Mehanistik perbudhakan langgar aturan macem sing bisa awak dhéwé nggawe gerakan kelas sing luwih dumadhi lan tuytir, lan uga bantuan ingkang sampek modèl sing bisa nguasai iki bakal terus-terusahaan. Kernel Tungkin nggawe Perintah sing paling nggawe Daftar nggawe Perintah sing berarti dadi podho nggawe nyimpen kuwi, nggawe nyimpen mulai nggawe Daftar nggawe Bih-LTT M seneng dataset ng semi-hekal, task 4A . Nalika sing pergunakake sing wis ambang tanggal saben 1 ing Subtask E 'Multi-Label emuation CLSS', 2 ing Subtask A 'emuation Intensity Regration' lan arno sing wis dipolehasno sakjane kapan tanggal sing wis ana.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנחנו מציגים דוגמנים ללימודים עמוקים ששלחו לתחרות משימה 1 SemEval-2018: "השפעה בטוויטס". השתתפנו בכל התשואלות לטוויטים אנגליים. אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה ביי-LSTM מוכשרת במנגנון תשומת לב עצמית במספר שכבות. מנגנון תשומת לב משפר את ההופעה של המודל ומאפשר לנו לזהות מילים מפורסמות בטוויטים, כמו גם להשיג תובנה לדוגמנים שהופכים אותם יותר ניתן להפריע. המודל שלנו משתמש בסט של מילים מילים 2vec מאומנים על אוסף גדול של 550 מיליון הודעות טוויטר, מוגדלים על ידי סט של תכונות מילים חיוביות. Due to the limited amount of task-specific training data, we opted for a transfer learning approach by pretraining the Bi-LSTMs on the dataset of Semeval 2017, Task 4A.  הגישה הציעה התייצבה ראשונה בתפקיד E \'מסווג רגשות רבות-תגים\', השנייה בתפקיד A \'חזרה חשמלית רגשות\' ושיגה תוצאות תחרותיות בתפקידים אחרים.', 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་རྣམ་པ་ལྡན་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་པ་དེ་ནི་SemEval-2018 དྲ་རྒྱའི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་དོན་ལྟར་དང་པོ་ ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་འགོད་ཐེངས་ཕྱི་རྗེས་སུ་འཇུག་སྟེ། ང་ཚོས་Bi-LSTM་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་དང་སྣ་མང་ཆེ་བའི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཞལ་འཛུགས་སྒྲིག་ཆས་ཤིག་གི་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོར་དྲ་བར་ནང་གི་salient གཟུགས་རིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། མ་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་གྱིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དུ་བརྗོད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་བསྟེན་ནས་ སྐྱེལ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྲོད་རྒྱུ་དང་། The proposed approach ranked 1 in Subtask E 'Multi-Label Emotion Classification', 2 in Subtask A 'Emotion Intensity Regression' and achieved competitive results in other subtasks.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo modele globokega učenja, ki so se predložili natečaju SemEval-2018 Task 1: "Affect in Tweets". Sodelovali smo pri vseh podnalogah za angleške tweete. Predlagamo Bi-LSTM arhitekturo, opremljeno z večplastnim mehanizmom samopozornosti. Mehanizem pozornosti izboljša učinkovitost modela in nam omogoča prepoznavanje pomembnih besed v tweetih ter vpogled v modele, zaradi česar so bolj razložljive. Naš model uporablja nabor besednih vdelav word2vec, usposobljenih na veliki zbirki 550 milijonov Twitterjevih sporočil, dopolnjenih z naborom besednih afektivnih funkcij. Zaradi omejene količine podatkov o usposabljanju za posamezne naloge smo se odločili za pristop prenosnega učenja s predusposabljanjem Bi-LSTMs na podatkovnem naboru Semeval 2017, naloga 4A. Predlagani pristop se je uvrstil na prvo mesto v podnalogo E "Razvrstitev več znakov čustev", drugo mesto v podnalogo A "Regresija intenzivnosti čustev" in dosegel konkurenčne rezultate v drugih podnalogah.'}
{'en': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'ar': 'CrystalFeel في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: فهم واكتشاف شدة العاطفة باستخدام المعاجم المؤثرة', 'fr': "CrystalFeel à SemEval-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Comprendre et détecter l'intensité des émotions à l'aide de lexiques affectifs", 'pt': 'CrystalFeel na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Entendendo e Detectando a Intensidade da Emoção usando Léxicos Afetivos', 'es': 'CrystalFeel en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Comprender y detectar la intensidad de las emociones mediante léxicos afectivos', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク1におけるCrystalFeel ：感情的な語彙を使用した感情の強さの理解と検出', 'zh': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 务1:以情词典知检', 'ru': 'CrystalFeel на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Понимание и обнаружение интенсивности эмоций с помощью аффективных лексиконов', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर CrystalFeel: भावात्मक शब्दकोशों का उपयोग करके भावना तीव्रता को समझना और पता लगाना', 'ga': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Déine Mothúcháin a Thuiscint agus a Bhrath ag Úsáid Foclóirí Aifriúla', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Κατανόηση και Ανίχνευση της Έντασης Συναισθηματισμού με χρήση Επιθετικών Λεξιδίων', 'hu': 'CrystalFeel a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Az érzelmi intenzitás megértése és észlelése az érintett lexikonok segítségével', 'it': "CrystalFeel a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Comprendere e rilevare l'intensità delle emozioni utilizzando le lessiche affettive", 'kk': 'Кристалды сезім 1- жарты- 2018 тапсырмасында: эффективті лексикаларды қолданып көңіл күйін түсіну және анықтау', 'lt': 'CrystalFeel per 2018 m. pusmetį 1 užduotis: Emocijos intensyvumo supratimas ir nustatymas naudojant veikiančius leksikonus', 'mk': 'CrystalFeel на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Разбирање и детектирање на емоционална интензитет користејќи Affective Lexicons', 'ms': 'CrystalFeel pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Memahami dan Mengesan Intensiti Emosi menggunakan Lexicon Affective', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1- ലെ ക്രിസ്റ്റാള്\u200dഫീല്\u200d: എഫിക്സിവ് ലെക്സിക്കോണുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടും എമോട്ട', 'mn': 'КристалFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affective Lexicions Use Emotion Intensity Understanding and Detecting', 'mt': 'CrystalFeel f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Il-fehim u l-identifikazzjoni tal-Intensità Emoċjali bl-użu ta’ Lexicons Affettivi', 'no': 'CrystalFeel at halvEval-2018 oppgåve 1: forståking og oppdaging av emosjonsintensitet ved bruk av effektiv leksjonar', 'pl': 'CrystalFeel w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Zrozumienie i wykrywanie intensywności emocji przy użyciu leksykonów afektywnych', 'ro': 'CrystalFeel la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Înțelegerea și detectarea intensității emoțiilor folosind Lexiconuri afective', 'sr': 'CrystalFeel na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 1: razumevanje i otkrivanje intenzitete emocija koristeći efikasne lekcije', 'so': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'si': 'CrystalFeel at Halfeval-2018 Job 1: Understanding and Detected Emotion Intensty Use Affective Lexicons', 'sv': 'CrystalFeel på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Förstå och upptäcka känslointensitet med hjälp av affektiva Lexikoner', 'ur': 'کریسٹلفئل ۲۰۱۸ ٹاکس ۱ میں کریسٹلفئل: اثرات لکسیسوں کے استعمال سے احساسات انٹنسیٹی کا سمجھنا اور پتچانا', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் கிரிஸ்டால்Feel at SemEval- 2018 Task 1: Effective Lexicons using Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity', 'vi': 'Mật cảm tại nhiệm vụ Semkhai ly-thẩm 8: Sự hiểu biết và phát hiện kích động bằng độ mạnh có tác dụng', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Разбиране и откриване на интензивността на емоциите чрез афективни лексикони', 'hr': 'CrystalFeel na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 1: razumijevanje i otkrivanje intenzitete emocija koristeći učinkovite lekcije', 'da': 'CrystalFeel på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Forståelse og detektering af følelsesintensitet ved hjælp af affektive Lexikoner', 'de': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Emotionsintensität verstehen und erkennen mit affektiven Lexikonen', 'id': 'CrystalFeel di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Memahami dan mendeteksi Intensitas Emosi menggunakan Lexicon Affective', 'nl': 'CrystalFeel bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Begrijpen en Detecteren van Emotie Intensiteit met behulp van Affectieve Lexiconen', 'ko': 'SemEval-18의 CrystalFeel 퀘스트 1: 감정 어휘를 사용하여 감정의 강도를 이해하고 측정한다', 'tr': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'af': 'CrystalFeel by semiEval-2018 Taak 1: Verstaan en beskrywing van Emotisieintensiteit gebruik effektiewe leksies', 'fa': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'sq': 'CrystalFeel në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'sw': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'am': 'ስራ 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'hy': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'az': 'YarńĪm Eval-2018 Task 1: Afektiv Lexiksiyalar vasit…ôsil…ô EmotiyonlarńĪn HeyvanlńĪńüńĪnńĪ anlamaq v…ô keŇüfetm…ôk', 'cs': 'CrystalFeel na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Pochopení a detekce emoční intenzity pomocí affektivních Lexikonů', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ক্রিস্টাল ফেল ১: আফেক্টিভ লেক্সিকোন ব্যবহার করে বুঝতে এবং ইমোটেশন সুবিধা সনাক্ত করতে পারে', 'fi': 'CrystalFeel SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Tunteiden intensiteetin ymmärtäminen ja havaitseminen afektiivisilla leksikoneilla', 'ca': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'et': 'CrystalFeel SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Emotsioonide intensiivsuse mõistmine ja tuvastamine mõjutavate leksikoonide abil', 'bs': 'CrystalFeel na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 1: razumijevanje i otkrivanje intenzitete emocija koristeći efektivne lekcije', 'jv': 'cristalFel nang semi-2008 task 1', 'sk': 'CrystalFeel na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Razumevanje in zaznavanje intenzivnosti čustev z uporabo afektivnih leksikonov', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'he': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons', 'bo': 'CrystalFeel at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Understanding and Detecting Emotion Intensity using Affective Lexicons'}
{'en': 'While sentiment and emotion analysis has received a considerable amount of research attention, the notion of understanding and detecting the intensity of emotions is relatively less explored. This paper describes a system developed for predicting emotion intensity in tweets. Given a Twitter message, CrystalFeel uses features derived from parts-of-speech, n-grams, word embedding, and multiple affective lexicons including Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, and our in-house developed EI Lexicons to predict the degree of the intensity associated with fear, anger, sadness, and joy in the tweet. We found that including the affective lexicons-based features allowed the system to obtain strong prediction performance, while revealing interesting emotion word-level and message-level associations. On gold test data, CrystalFeel obtained Pearson correlations of 0.717 on average emotion intensity and of 0.816 on sentiment intensity.', 'ar': 'في حين أن تحليل المشاعر والعواطف قد تلقى قدرًا كبيرًا من الاهتمام البحثي ، فإن فكرة فهم واكتشاف شدة المشاعر أقل استكشافًا نسبيًا. تصف هذه الورقة نظامًا تم تطويره للتنبؤ بكثافة العاطفة في التغريدات. بالنظر إلى رسالة Twitter ، يستخدم CrystalFeel الميزات المستمدة من أجزاء الكلام ، و n-grams ، وتضمين الكلمات ، والعديد من المفردات العاطفية بما في ذلك معجم الرأي ، و SentiSt Strength ، و AFFIN ، و NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion ، ومعجم EI المطور داخليًا لدينا توقع درجة الشدة المصاحبة للخوف والغضب والحزن والفرح في التغريدة. وجدنا أن تضمين الميزات القائمة على المعاجم العاطفية سمح للنظام بالحصول على أداء تنبؤ قوي ، مع الكشف عن ارتباطات مثيرة للاهتمام على مستوى الكلمات ومستوى الرسالة. في بيانات اختبار الذهب ، حصل CrystalFeel على ارتباطات بيرسون تبلغ 0.717 في متوسط شدة العاطفة و 0.816 على شدة المشاعر.', 'fr': "Bien que l'analyse des sentiments et des émotions ait fait l'objet d'une grande attention de la recherche, la notion de compréhension et de détection de l'intensité des émotions est relativement moins explorée. Cet article décrit un système développé pour prédire l'intensité des émotions dans les tweets. À partir d'un message Twitter, CrystalFeel utilise des fonctionnalités dérivées de parties du discours, de n-grammes, d'incorporation de mots et de multiples lexiques affectifs, y compris le lexique d'opinion, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion et Hash Emotion, et nos lexiques IE développés en interne pour prédire le degré d'intensité associé à la peur, de la colère, de la tristesse et de la joie dans le tweet. Nous avons constaté que l'inclusion des fonctionnalités basées sur les lexiques affectifs permettait au système d'obtenir de bonnes performances de prédiction, tout en révélant des associations intéressantes au niveau des mots et des messages d'émotion. Sur des données de test Gold, CrystalFeel a obtenu des corrélations de Pearson de 0,717 pour l'intensité moyenne des émotions et de 0,816 pour l'intensité des sentiments.", 'pt': 'Embora a análise de sentimentos e emoções tenha recebido uma quantidade considerável de atenção da pesquisa, a noção de entender e detectar a intensidade das emoções é relativamente menos explorada. Este artigo descreve um sistema desenvolvido para prever a intensidade da emoção em tweets. Dada uma mensagem do Twitter, CrystalFeel usa recursos derivados de partes de fala, n-grams, incorporação de palavras e vários léxicos afetivos, incluindo Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, e nossos EI Lexicons desenvolvidos internamente para prever o grau de intensidade associado ao medo, raiva, tristeza e alegria no tweet. Descobrimos que incluir os recursos baseados em léxicos afetivos permitiu que o sistema obtivesse um forte desempenho de previsão, ao mesmo tempo em que revelava associações interessantes em nível de palavra e nível de mensagem. Nos dados do teste de ouro, CrystalFeel obteve correlações de Pearson de 0,717 na intensidade média da emoção e de 0,816 na intensidade do sentimento.', 'es': 'Si bien el análisis de sentimientos y emociones ha recibido una considerable atención de investigación, la noción de comprender y detectar la intensidad de las emociones está relativamente menos explorada. Este artículo describe un sistema desarrollado para predecir la intensidad de las emociones en los tuits. Dado un mensaje de Twitter, CrystalFeel utiliza funciones derivadas de partes del discurso, n-gramas, incrustación de palabras y múltiples lexicones afectivos, incluidos Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion y Hash Emotion, y nuestros léxicos EI desarrollados internamente para predecir el grado de intensidad asociado con el miedo. enfado, tristeza y alegría en el tuit. Descubrimos que incluir las funciones basadas en léxicos afectivos permitía al sistema obtener un fuerte rendimiento de predicción, al tiempo que revelaba asociaciones interesantes a nivel de palabras y mensajes de emociones. En los datos de la prueba de oro, CrystalFeel obtuvo correlaciones de Pearson de 0.717 en la intensidad de la emoción promedio y de 0.816 en la intensidad del sentimiento.', 'ja': '感情と感情の分析はかなりの量の研究に注目されているが、感情の強さを理解して検出するという概念は比較的あまり探求されていない。本稿では、ツイートにおける感情の強さを予測するために開発されたシステムについて述べる。Twitterのメッセージでは、CrystalFeelは、オピニオンレキシコン、SentiStrongth、AFFIN、NRC Emotion &amp; Hash Emotion、および当社が自社開発したEI Lexiconsを含む、発話の一部、n - gram、単語の埋め込み、および複数の感情的な辞書から派生した機能を使用して、ツイートの恐怖、怒り、悲しみ、喜びに関連する強度の程度を予測します。情動的な辞書ベースの機能を含むことで、システムは強力な予測パフォーマンスを得ることができ、一方で、興味深い感情のワードレベルとメッセージレベルの関連性を明らかにしました。金試験データでは、CrystalFeelは平均感情強度で0.717、感情強度で0.816のピアソン相関を得た。', 'zh': '虽情析已大,解检强相少。 本文描述了一个测量推文中情况强度的系统。 给定Twitter消息,CrystalFeel用自词性,n-grams,单词嵌数情词典(包Opinion Lexicon,SentiStrength,AFFIN,NRC EmotionHash Emotion)及内发之EI词典以占推文之惧,怒,悲喜之度也。 见情词典之征,使统得强大之占,而发趣之情词级与消息相关。 黄金测试数据上,CrystalFeel情强为0.717,情强为0.816。', 'hi': 'जबकि भावना और भावना विश्लेषण ने काफी मात्रा में शोध ध्यान प्राप्त किया है, भावनाओं की तीव्रता को समझने और पता लगाने की धारणा अपेक्षाकृत कम पता लगाई गई है। यह पेपर ट्वीट्स में भावना तीव्रता की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए विकसित एक प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है। एक ट्विटर संदेश को देखते हुए, CrystalFeel भागों से व्युत्पन्न सुविधाओं का उपयोग करता है भाषण, एन-ग्राम, शब्द एम्बेडिंग, और राय Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC भावना और हैश भावना सहित कई भावात्मक शब्दकोश, और हमारे इन-हाउस विकसित EI Lexicons चहचहाना में डर, क्रोध, उदासी और खुशी से जुड़ी तीव्रता की डिग्री की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए। हमने पाया कि भावात्मक शब्दकोश-आधारित सुविधाओं सहित सिस्टम को मजबूत भविष्यवाणी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने की अनुमति दी गई, जबकि दिलचस्प भावना शब्द-स्तर और संदेश-स्तर के संघों का खुलासा किया गया। सोने के परीक्षण डेटा पर, CrystalFeel औसत भावना तीव्रता पर 0.717 और भावना तीव्रता पर 0.816 के पियर्सन सहसंबंध प्राप्त किया।', 'ru': 'Хотя анализ чувств и эмоций привлек значительное внимание исследователей, понятие понимания и обнаружения интенсивности эмоций относительно менее изучено. Эта статья описывает систему, разработанную для прогнозирования интенсивности эмоций в твитах. Учитывая сообщение в Twitter, CrystalFeel использует функции, полученные из частей речи, n-грамм, встраивания слов и нескольких аффективных лексиконов, включая Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion &amp; Hash Emotion и наши собственные разработанные EI Lexicons, чтобы предсказать степень интенсивности, связанной со страхом, гневом, печалью и радостью в твите. Мы обнаружили, что включение функций на основе аффективных лексиконов позволило системе получить высокую производительность прогнозирования, одновременно выявив интересные ассоциации на уровне слов и сообщений. По данным золотого теста, CrystalFeel получил корреляции Пирсона 0,717 в среднем по интенсивности эмоций и 0,816 по интенсивности настроений.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil go leor aird taighde faighte ag anailís ar mhothúcháin agus ar mhothúcháin, ní dhéantar iniúchadh níos lú ar an nóisean maidir le déine na mothúchán a thuiscint agus a bhrath. Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chóras a forbraíodh chun déine na mothúchán i dtvuíteanna a thuar. I bhfianaise teachtaireacht Twitter, úsáideann CrystalFeel gnéithe a dhíorthaítear ó chodanna cainte, n-gram, leabú focal, agus foclóirí mothúchánacha iolracha lena n-áirítear Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, agus ár n-intí forbartha ag EI Lexicons to méid na déine a bhaineann le eagla, fearg, brón agus áthas sa tweet a thuar. Fuaireamar amach gur chuir na gnéithe mothaitheacha bunaithe ar fhoclóirí ar chumas an chórais feidhmíocht láidir réamhaisnéise a bhaint amach, agus ag an am céanna nochtar cumainn spéisiúla ar leibhéal na bhfocal agus ar leibhéal na teachtaireachta. Ar shonraí tástála óir, fuair CrystalFeel comhghaolta Pearson de 0.717 ar an meán-déine mothúchán agus 0.816 ar dhéine meon.', 'hu': 'Míg az érzelmi és érzelmi elemzés jelentős mennyiségű kutatási figyelmet kapott, az érzelmek intenzitásának megértésének és felismerésének fogalmát viszonylag kevésbé vizsgálják. Ez a tanulmány egy olyan rendszert ír le, amelyet az érzelmek intenzitásának előrejelzésére fejlesztettek ki tweetekben. Twitter üzenetben a CrystalFeel olyan funkciókat használ, amelyek a beszédrészekből, n-grammokból, szóbeágyazásból és számos affektív lexikonból származnak, mint például Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, valamint a saját fejlesztésű EI Lexikonjainkból, hogy megjósolják, milyen intenzitással járnak a tweetben a félelem, a düh, a szomorúság és az öröm. Megállapítottuk, hogy az affektív lexikon alapú tulajdonságok bevonása lehetővé tette a rendszer számára, hogy erős predikciós teljesítményt érjen el, miközben érdekes érzelmi szó- és üzenetszintű asszociációkat fed fel. Arany teszt adatai alapján a CrystalFeel Pearson korrelációt kapott 0,717 átlagos érzelmi intenzitással és 0,816 érzelmi intenzitással.', 'el': 'Ενώ η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και συναισθημάτων έχει λάβει σημαντική ερευνητική προσοχή, η έννοια της κατανόησης και της ανίχνευσης της έντασης των συναισθημάτων είναι σχετικά λιγότερο διερευνημένη. Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει ένα σύστημα που αναπτύχθηκε για την πρόβλεψη της έντασης των συναισθημάτων στα tweets. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη ένα μήνυμα στο Twitter, το CrystalFeel χρησιμοποιεί λειτουργίες που προέρχονται από τμήματα ομιλίας, ν-γραμμάτια, ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και πολλαπλά συναισθηματικά λεξικά, συμπεριλαμβανομένων του Λεξικό Γνώσης, του και του στο εσωτερικό μας αναπτυγμένα Λεξικό για να προβλέψει τον βαθμό της έντασης που σχετίζεται με το φόβο, το θυμό, τη θλίψη και τη χαρά στο tweet. Διαπιστώσαμε ότι η συμπερίληψη των χαρακτηριστικών που βασίζονται στα συναισθηματικά λεξικά επέτρεψε στο σύστημα να αποκτήσει ισχυρή απόδοση πρόβλεψης, ενώ αποκαλύπτει ενδιαφέρουσες συσχετίσεις σε επίπεδο λέξεων και μηνυμάτων συναισθημάτων. Σε δεδομένα χρυσού, το CrystalFeel έλαβε συσχετισμούς Pearson 0.717 στη μέση ένταση συναισθημάτων και 0.816 στην ένταση συναισθημάτων.', 'ka': 'მაგრამ სენტიმენტი და ემოციონის ანალიზაცია მიიღეთ ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი პასუხის შესახებ, ემოციონის ინტენსტივის შესახებ უფრო ცოტა განსხვავება. ეს წიგნი განვითარებს სისტემის განვითარებისთვის ემოციონის ინტენსტივის შესახებ. TwitterComment ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ შესაძლებელი ლექსიკონის განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციები შეგვიძლია სისტემის ძალიან წარმოდგენების გამოყენება, როცა ინტერესური ემოციონის სიტყვების დო ჱლარნთრვ რვჟრჲგნთ данნთ ნა კპთჟრალტთლ ოჲლსფთლ ოვპჟჲნ კჲპვლაუთთ ნა 0,717 ნა ჟპვენარა ვმჲუთჲნჟკა თნრვჟთრნჲჟრ თ 0,816 ნა ჟვნრთმვნრ თნრვჟთრნჲჟრ', 'it': "Mentre l'analisi dei sentimenti e delle emozioni ha ricevuto una notevole quantità di attenzione alla ricerca, la nozione di comprensione e rilevazione dell'intensità delle emozioni è relativamente meno esplorata. Questo articolo descrive un sistema sviluppato per prevedere l'intensità delle emozioni nei tweet. Dato un messaggio Twitter, CrystalFeel utilizza funzionalità derivate da parti del discorso, n-grammi, embedding di parole e molteplici lessici affettivi tra cui Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, e i nostri Lexicon EI sviluppati internamente per prevedere il grado di intensità associato a paura, rabbia, tristezza e gioia nel tweet. Abbiamo scoperto che l'inclusione delle caratteristiche affettive basate sui lessici ha permesso al sistema di ottenere prestazioni predittive forti, rivelando interessanti associazioni emotive a livello di parola e messaggio. Sulla base dei dati gold test, CrystalFeel ha ottenuto correlazioni Pearson pari a 0,717 sull'intensità emotiva media e di 0,816 sull'intensità sentimentale.", 'lt': 'Nors jausmų ir emocijų analizė buvo daug dėmesio skiriama moksliniams tyrimams, jausmų intensyvumo supratimo ir aptikimo sąvoka yra palyginti mažesnė. Šiame dokumente aprašoma sistema, sukurta norint prognozuoti emocijų intensyvumą tweetuose. Atsižvelgiant į Twitter pranešimą, CrystalFeel naudoja savybes, gautas iš kalbos dalių, n-gramų, žodžių įterpimo ir daugelio įtakingų leksikonų, įskaitant nuomonės leksikoną, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, ir mūsų namuose sukurti EI leksikonai, kad nuspėtume intensyvumo laipsnį, susijusį su baime, pyktimi, liūdnu ir džiaugsmu tweete. Mes nustatėme, kad įtraukiant įtakingus leksikonus grindžiamus požymius sistema galėjo pasiekti tvirtą prognozavimo rezultatą, atskleidžiant įdomias emocijas žodžių ir žinių lygio asociacijas. Remiantis aukso bandymų duomenimis, CrystalFeel gavo Pearson koreliacijas 0,717 vidutinio emocinio intensyvumo ir 0,816 jautrumo intensyvumo.', 'ms': 'Sementara analisis perasaan dan emosi telah menerima banyak perhatian penyelidikan, gagasan pemahaman dan mengesan intensiti emosi relatif kurang dikeksplorasi. Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang dikembangkan untuk meramalkan intensiti emosi dalam tweet. Mengingat mesej Twitter, CrystalFeel menggunakan ciri-ciri yang berasal dari bahagian-dari-ucapan, n-gram, penyembelihan perkataan, dan leksikon yang berbilang-besaran termasuk Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, dan dalam rumah kami mengembangkan EI Lexicon untuk meramalkan darjah intensiti yang berkaitan dengan ketakutan, kemarahan, kesedihan, dan kegembiraan dalam tweet. Kami mendapati bahawa termasuk ciri-ciri berasas leksikon yang mempengaruhi membenarkan sistem untuk mendapatkan prestasi ramalan yang kuat, sementara mengungkapkan emosi yang menarik perhubungan aras perkataan dan aras mesej. Dalam data ujian emas, CrystalFeel mendapat korelasi Pearson 0.717 pada intensiti emosi rata-rata dan 0.816 pada intensiti perasaan.', 'mk': 'Иако анализата на чувствата и емоциите доби значително внимание од истражувањето, идејата за разбирање и детектирање на интензитетот на емоциите е релативно помалку истражена. Овој весник опишува систем развиен за предвидување на емоционалниот интензитет на твитови. Со оглед на пораката од Твитер, CrystalFeel користи карактеристики кои се извлечени од делови на говорот, n-грами, вградување на зборови, и многуте афективни лексикони, вклучувајќи го и Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, и нашите внатрешни развиени EI Lexicons за да го предвидат степенот на интензитетот поврзан со страв, бес, тага и радост на Твитер. Најдовме дека вклучувајќи ги и ефективните лексикони карактеристики му овозможија на системот да добие силна предвидлива перформанса, истовремено откривајќи интересни емоции зборови и пораки. On gold test data, CrystalFeel obtained Pearson correlations of 0.717 on average emotion intensity and of 0.816 on sentiment intensity.', 'ml': 'വികാരങ്ങളും വികാരങ്ങളും അന്വേഷിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഒരുപാട് പഠനത്തിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ കിട്ടിയിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, വികാരങ്ങളുടെ ഉയര്\u200dച്ചയും കണ്ടെത് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തെ വിവരിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. വികാരത്തിന്റെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കാ ഒരു ടൂട്ടര്\u200d സന്ദേശം കൊണ്ട്, ക്രിസ്റ്റല്\u200dഫീല്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിന്നും വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രത്യേകങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഓപിനിയോന്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d, സെന്\u200dറിസ്ട്രോര്\u200dട്ട്, എഫ്ഫ ബാധിക്കുന്ന ലെക്സിക്കോണുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് ശക്തമായ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിച്ചു എന്ന സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ക്രിസ്റ്റല്\u200dഫീല്\u200d സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d 0. 717 സാധാരണ വികാരത്തിന്റെ വീക്ഷണത്', 'mt': 'While sentiment and emotion analysis has received a considerable amount of research attention, the notion of understanding and detecting the intensity of emotions is relatively less explored.  Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi sistema żviluppata biex tipprevedi l-intensità emozzjonali fit-tweets. Minħabba messaġġ fuq Twitter, CrystalFeel tuża karatteristiċi derivati minn partijiet ta’ diskors, n-grammi, inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem, u lexikoni affettivi multipli inklużi l-Opinjoni Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, u l-EI Lexicons żviluppati f’pajjiżna tagħna biex jipprevedu l-grad tal-intensità assoċjata mal-biża’, ir-rabja, il-tristezza, u l-pjaċir fit-tweet. Instabna li l-inklużjoni tal-karatteristiċi affetttivi bbażati fuq il-lexicons ippermettiet lis-sistema tikseb prestazzjoni qawwija ta’ tbassir, filwaqt li żvelat assoċjazzjonijiet interessanti bejn il-livell tal-kelma u l-livell tal-messaġġ. Fuq id-dejta tat-test tad-deheb, CrystalFeel kisbet korrelazzjonijiet tal-Pearson ta’ 0.717 fuq l-intensità medja tal-emozzjoni u ta’ 0.816 fuq l-intensità tas-sentiment.', 'no': 'Mens sentimentanalysen og emosjonar har fått ein betydelig mengd forskningsoppmerksomhet, er det relativt mindre utforska om forståking og oppdaging av intensiteten av emosjonar. Denne papiret skildrar eit systemet utvikla for å foregå følelsesintensitet i tweets. Gjennomsikt eit Twitter-melding bruker CrystalFeel funksjonar utvikla frå deler av tale, n-gramar, ordinnbåde, og fleire påvirkelige leksjonar, inkludert Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, og vårt innbygging utvikla EI-leksjonar for å foregå kor mykje intensitet tilknyttet med frykt, galt, trist og gøyd i tweet. Vi fann at inkludert dei påvirkelige funksjonane baserte på leksikonsbaserte tillatt systemet å få sterk forhåndsvising, mens det gjer oppdaging av interessante forhåndsvisningar for ordnivå og meldingnivå. På gull-test data fikk CrystalFeel Pearson-korrelasjonar med 0,717 på gjennomsnittlig emosjonsintensitet og 0,816 på sentimentintensitet.', 'mn': 'Хэдийгээр сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ маш их судалгааны анхаарал авсан ч, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчирхэг байдлыг ойлгох, мэдрэмжтэй байдлыг мэдэх ойлголт нь харьцангуй бага Энэ цаас tweets дээр сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчтэй байдлыг таамаглах системийг тайлбарладаг. Твиттерийн санаагаар CrystalFeel нь хэсэг хэсэг, н-грамм, үг нэвтрүүлэх, олон нөлөөтэй лексиконуудыг ашиглаж, сантиStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion болон бидний гэр бүлийн EI лексиконууд айдас, уур, гунигтай, баяр хөөрөмжтэй холбогдсон хэмжээсүүдийг тодорхойлдог. Бид илтгэлийн үндсэн чадварууд нь системийг хүчтэй таамаглах үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, сонирхолтой сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэмжээний түвшин, санааны түвшин холбоотой байгууллагуудыг харуулж чадна. Алтын туршилтын өгөгдлийн хувьд КристалFeel Персон дундаж сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчирхэг байдалд 0.717 гарч ирсэн бөгөөд мэдрэмжийн хүчирхэг байдалд 0.816 гарч ирсэн.', 'kk': 'Сезімдер мен эмоциялық анализ зерттеулердің көп бөлігін алғанда, емоциялардың көпшілігін түсіндіру және анықтау арқылы көпшілігін салыстыру керек. Бұл қағаз таңдау үшін эмоциялық теңдігін таңдау жүйесін таңдайды. Твиттердің хабарламасы болса, КристалFeel сөздердің бөліктерінен, n- граммалардан, сөздерді ендіру және бірнеше әсер ететін лексикондарды қолданады, сондай-ақ: Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, және үйіміздің EI лексикондарымыз қорқынышты, қатты, қатты, қатты және бақытты көңі Біз тексерген лекциялар негіздеген мүмкіндіктері жүйесіне күшті таңдау мүмкіндігін жеткізуге мүмкіндік береді, сондай-ақ емоциялық сөздер деңгейі мен хат деңгейінің қатынасын Алтын сынақтар мәліметінде CrystalFeel Персондың орташа емоциялық қанықтығын 0,717 көмегімен, мәлімет қанықтығын 0,816 көмегімен алды.', 'pl': 'Chociaż analiza sentymentów i emocji otrzymała znaczną uwagę badawczą, pojęcie zrozumienia i wykrywania intensywności emocji jest stosunkowo mniej zbadane. W artykule opisano system opracowany do przewidywania intensywności emocji w tweetach. Biorąc pod uwagę wiadomość na Twitterze, CrystalFeel wykorzystuje funkcje pochodzące z części mowy, n-gramów, osadzania słów i wielu leksykonów afektywnych, w tym słowników opinii, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion/Hash Emotion oraz nasze wewnętrzne opracowane leksykony EI, aby przewidzieć stopień intensywności związanej ze strachem, gniewem, smutem i radością w tweecie. Odkryliśmy, że włączenie funkcji afektywnych opartych na leksykonach pozwoliło systemowi uzyskać silną wydajność przewidywania, jednocześnie ujawniając ciekawe skojarzenia słowa emocji i komunikatu na poziomie. Na podstawie danych z testów złota CrystalFeel uzyskał korelacje Pearsona o średniej intensywności emocji 0,717 oraz o intensywności sentymentów 0,816.', 'si': 'සංවේදනය සහ හ හැඟීම විශ්ලේෂණය ගොඩක් ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණ අවධානයක් ලැබුනොත්, තේරුම් ගන්න සහ හ හැඟීම් අවධානයක්  මේ පත්තර විස්තර කරනවා තවිට් වල හැඟීමක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පද්ධතියක්. Given a Twitter message, CrystalFeel Uses Fearts from Parts-of-Talk, n-gram, word Embding, and Multiaffective lexicons, incl. Understanding Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, and our in-house develops EI Lexicons to forecast the Grade of the Intersity Associate with Fear, Anger, Sadness, and Glass in the tweet. අපි හොයාගත්තා කියලා ප්\u200dරභාවිත ලෙක්සිකන්ස් අධාරිත විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන්නේ පද්ධතියට ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන සුන්ධ පරීක්ෂණ දත්තේ ක්\u200dරිස්ටල්ෆිල් පියර්සන් ගැන 0.717 වල සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිතාවක් සහ 0.816 වල සංවේදනය ගැන සම්බන්ධත', 'sr': 'Iako je analiza sentiment a i emocija dobila značajnu količinu istraživanja, pojma razumevanja i otkrivanja intenziteta emocija je relativno manje istražena. Ovaj papir opisuje sistem razvijen za predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete u tweetima. S obzirom n a tvitersku poruku, CrystalFeel koristi karakteristike iz dijelova govora, n-grama, ugrađenja reči i višestruke utjecajne leksione uključujući Leksion, SentiStrength, AFFIN, Emotion NRC i Hash emocije, i n a ša unutrašnja leksija razvila su EI leksione kako bi predvidjela stepenicu intenzitete povezane sa strahom, besom, tugom i radošću u tweetu. Pronašli smo da uključujući uticajne karakteristike na temelju leksiona omogućavaju sistem da dobije jake predviđanje, dok otkrivaju zanimljive udruženje na nivou reči i nivou poruke. KrystalFeel je dobio korelaciju od 0,717 na prosječnoj emocionalnoj intenziteti i od 0,816 na sentimentalnoj intenziteti.', 'ro': 'În timp ce analiza sentimentelor și emoțiilor a primit o cantitate considerabilă de atenție de cercetare, noțiunea de înțelegere și detectare a intensității emoțiilor este relativ mai puțin explorată. Această lucrare descrie un sistem dezvoltat pentru a anticipa intensitatea emoțiilor în tweet-uri. Având în vedere un mesaj Twitter, CrystalFeel utilizează caracteristici derivate din părți de vorbire, n-grame, încorporarea cuvintelor și mai multe lexicoane afective, inclusiv Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, iar Lexiconul EI dezvoltat intern pentru a prezice gradul de intensitate asociat cu frica, furia, tristețea și bucuria din tweet. Am constatat că includerea caracteristicilor bazate pe lexicoane afective a permis sistemului să obțină performanțe de predicție puternice, dezvăluind în același timp asociații interesante la nivel emoțional de cuvânt și mesaj. Pe baza datelor testului aur, CrystalFeel a obținut corelații Pearson de 0,717 la intensitatea medie a emoțiilor și de 0,816 la intensitatea sentimentelor.', 'ta': 'உணர்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சி பெற்றுள்ளது போது, உணர்வுகளின் உயரத்தை புரிந்து பார்க்கும் கருத்து குறைவாக தெரியும். இந்த காகிதத்தை தெரியும் ஒரு அமைப்பு உருவாக்கப்பட்டதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது தெரியும் உணர்வு உயரத்தை தெ ஒரு தொடர்பு செய்தியினால், கிரிஸ்டால்பீல் பேச்சின் பகுதிகளிலிருந்து கிடைக்கப்பட்ட பண்புகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, n- grams, word embedding, and multiple affecting lexicons including Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, and our house developed EI Lexicons to predict the intensity of fear, anger, sadness, and joy in the twe We found that including the affective lexicons-based features allowed the system to obtain strong prediction performance, while revealing interesting emotion word-level and message-level associations.  தங்கக் சோதனை தரவில், கிரிஸ்டால் பீல் 0. 717 தொடர்புகளில் கிடைத்தது சராசரி உணர்வு உயரம் மற்றும் 0. 816 உணர்வு உயரத்தில் உள்ளது.', 'so': 'Inta lagu sameynayo kaleemeynta iyo fikradda waxaa la helay taxadar aad u badan, fikrada waxgarashada iyo garashada waxyaabaha la kordhiyo waxyaabaha dareenka. Warqaddaas wuxuu ku qoraa nidaam horumarinta si uu u sii sheego koritaanka fikrada oo uu Twitteetka ku qoro. Wixii warqad Twitterka ah, CrystalFeel wuxuu isticmaalaa tayooyin ka soo baxa qeybaha hadalka, n-gram, word embedding, iyo lexico badan oo saameyn leh, including Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, iyo gurigeenna horumariyey EI Leksisions in uu sii sheego darajada xiliga la xiriira cabsi, xanaaq, calool, iyo farxada tweetka. Waxaynu helnay in kooxaha waxyaabaha saameyn ku leh ee leksikada lagu sameeyo ay nidaamka u heli karto bandhig xoog leh oo la sii sheego, iyadoo ay muuqato ururo farxad leh oo xiiso leh oo ku qoran heer iyo heer farriin ah. Macluumaadka imtixaanka dahabka ah ee CrystalFeel waxaad ka heleysaa xiriirka Pearson ee ugu dhexeeya 0.717 koronta daryeelka hissiga iyo waxyaabaha guud ee 0.816.', 'sv': 'Även om sentiment- och känsloanalys har fått en betydande mängd forskningsuppmärksamhet, utforskas begreppet förståelse och detektering av känslointensiteten relativt mindre. Denna uppsats beskriver ett system utvecklat för att förutsäga känslointensitet i tweets. Med ett Twitter-meddelande använder CrystalFeel funktioner som härrör från delar av tal, n-gram, ordinbäddning och flera affektiva lexikon, inklusive Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, och våra interna utvecklade EI Lexicons för att förutsäga graden av intensitet förknippad med rädsla, ilska, sorg och glädje i tweeten. Vi fann att inkluderandet av de affektiva lexikonbaserade funktionerna gjorde det möjligt för systemet att uppnå starka förutsägelseprestanda, samtidigt som det avslöjade intressanta känsloord-nivå och meddelandenivå associationer. På guldtestdata erhöll CrystalFeel Pearson korrelationer på 0,717 i genomsnittlig känslointensitet och 0,816 på sentimentintensitet.', 'ur': 'اگرچہ احساسات اور احساسات تحقیقات بہت زیادہ تحقیقات کی توجه حاصل ہوتی ہے، سمجھنے اور احساسات کی مضبوطی کا نظر نسبت کم تحقیق کیا جاتا ہے. یہ کاغذ ٹویٹوں میں احساسات کی تنگی کی پیش بینی کے لئے ایک سیستم کی توصیف کرتا ہے۔ ٹویٹر پیغام کے ذریعے کریستلفئل کی باتوں کے ٹکڑے سے، ن-گرم، کلمات میں داخل ہونے اور بہت سی اثر دینے والی لکسونز کے ذریعے استعمال کرتا ہے جن میں معلومات لکسیسون، SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC احساسات اور ہشا احساسات ہیں، اور ہمارے گھر میں EI لکسیسون کو ڈر، غصہ، غصہ اور توئٹ میں مزے کے درجے کی پیش آنے کے لئے پیش ہم نے معلوم ہوا کہ اثر دینے والی لکسونز کی بنیاد رکھنے والی موجودات کے ساتھ سیستم کو مضبوط پیش بینی کی عملی حاصل کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتی ہیں، جب کہ علاقمند احساسات لفظ لفظ اور پیغام لفظ کی تعلقات کو سونے کی آزمائش ڈیٹوں پر کریسٹلفئل نے پیرسون کی تعلقات 0.717 کے متوسط احساسات کی تنگی اور 0.816 کے متوسط احساسات کی تنگی پر موجود ہوئی۔', 'uz': "Chunki hissiyot va hissiyotni aniqlashda juda ko'p taʼminlovchi foydalanadi, hissiyotning eng kuchligini tushunish va aniqlash fikrini juda qisqarli ko'p ko'rinadi. Bu qogʻoz Twitterda hissiyotning eng kuchligini oldinga tizimni anglatadi. Twitterga xabar berilganda, KrystalFeel gapiruvchi qismlardan, n-grams, soʻzni koʻpaytirish va ko'plab tashkilotli leksikalardan foydalanadi. Bu yerda Opinion Lekson, SentiStrength, AFFFIN, NRC Emotion va Hash Emotion va Uygagi EI Leksikanlarning foydalanishimizni bajarish uchun foydalanadi. Twitterda qo'shish, хавф, хафа, va farzlik bilan bog'liq darajasini oldin. We found that including the affective lexicons-based features allowed the system to obtain strong prediction performance, while revealing interesting emotion word-level and message-level associations.  Davlat sinov maʼlumotlarida KrystalFeel 0. 717 yordamida yetarli hissiyot kuchi va 0. 816 dan foydalanuvchi darajada yetarligini olib keldi.", 'vi': 'Trong khi phân tích cảm xúc đã nhận được một lượng đáng kể sự chú ý của nghiên cứu, thì khái niệm hiểu biết và phát hiện sức mạnh của cảm xúc vẫn ít được khám phá hơn. Bài viết này mô tả một hệ thống dự đoán sức mạnh cảm xúc trên Twitter. Dựa vào một thông điệp trên Twitter, Crystalcảm sử dụng các tính n ăng bắt nguồn từ các bộ phận ngôn ngữ, n-gram, từ ngữ nhân tạo, và nhiều ngôn ngữ cảm xúc có bao gồm góp ý Ý kiến Lexicon, cảm xúc của NRC. bóng ma Đức, và nhà chúng tôi phát triển Ei Lexi để dự đoán độ mạnh độ của sự gắn liền với sợ hãi, tức giận, buồn bã và niềm vui trong dòng tweet. Chúng tôi tìm thấy rằng kể cả tính năng ngôn ngữ có tác dụng, cho phép hệ thống đạt được hiệu quả dự đoán mạnh mẽ, trong khi tiết lộ các liên quan ngôn ngữ xúc cảm và thông điệp. Trên dữ liệu thử nghiệm vàng, Crystalcảm nhận được các liên quan của Pearson về 0.717 với mức độ rung động trung bình và của 0.816 về độ rung cảm.', 'bg': 'Докато анализа на чувствата и емоциите е получил значително внимание на изследванията, понятието за разбиране и откриване на интензивността на емоциите е сравнително по-малко изследвано. Тази статия описва система, разработена за прогнозиране на интензивността на емоциите в туитове. Предвид съобщение в Туитър, използва функции, получени от части от речта, н-грамове, вграждане на думи и множество афективни лексикони, включително Лексикон на мнението, СентиСилта, АФФИН, Емоция и Хаш Емоция, както и нашите собствени разработени Лексикони, за да предскаже степента на интензивността, свързана със страх, гняв, тъга и радост в Туитър. Установихме, че включването на функциите, базирани на афективни лексикони, позволява на системата да получи силна предсказателна ефективност, като същевременно разкрива интересни емоционални асоциации на ниво дума и ниво послание. При златните тестове КристалФел получи корелации на Пиърсън от 0,717 за средна емоционална интензивност и от 0,816 за сентиментална интензивност.', 'da': 'Mens følelses- og følelsesanalyse har fået en betydelig mængde forskningsopmærksomhed, er begrebet om at forstå og detektere intensiteten af følelser relativt mindre udforsket. Denne artikel beskriver et system udviklet til at forudsige følelsesintensitet i tweets. Med en Twitter-meddelelse bruger CrystalFeel funktioner afledt af dele af tale, n-grams, ordindlejring og flere affektive leksikoner, herunder Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, og vores in-house udviklede EI Lexicons til at forudsige graden af intensiteten forbundet med frygt, vrede, sorg og glæde i tweeten. Vi fandt ud af, at inklusionen af de affektive leksikoner-baserede funktioner gjorde det muligt for systemet at opnå stærk forudsigelsesevne, samtidig med at det afslørede interessante følelsesord-niveau og budskabsniveau associationer. På guldtestdata opnåede CrystalFeel Pearson korrelationer på 0,717 i gennemsnitlig følelsesintensitet og på 0,816 på sentimentintensitet.', 'hr': 'Iako je analiza osjećaja i emocija dobila značajnu količinu istraživanja, pojma razumijevanja i otkrivanja intenziteta emocija je relativno manje istražena. Ovaj papir opisuje sustav razvijen za predviđanje intenziteta emocija u tweetima. S obzirom n a tvitersku poruku, CrystalFeel koristi karakteristike iz dijelova govora, n-grama, ugrađenih riječi i višestruke utjecajne leksione uključujući Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC emocije i Hash emocije, te n a ša domaća leksija razvila su EI kako bi predvidjela stupnju intenzitete povezane s strahom, bijesom, tugom i radošću u tweetu. Pronašli smo da uključujući utjecajne karakteristike na temelju lijekova omogućavaju sustav da dobije jake predviđanje, dok otkrivaju zanimljive udruženje razine emocija riječi i razine poruka. Na zlatnim testovima, CrystalFeel je dobio korelaciju Pearsona od 0,717 na prosječnoj intenziteti emocija i od 0,816 na intenzitet osjećaja.', 'nl': 'Hoewel sentiment- en emotieanalyse veel onderzoeksaandacht heeft gekregen, wordt het begrip begrip en detectie van de intensiteit van emoties relatief minder onderzocht. Dit artikel beschrijft een systeem ontwikkeld voor het voorspellen van emotie intensiteit in tweets. Gezien een Twitter-bericht, gebruikt CrystalFeel functies afgeleid van delen van spraak, n-grammen, woord embedding, en meerdere affectieve lexicons, waaronder opinielexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion for Hash Emotion, en onze in-house ontwikkelde EI Lexiconen om de mate van intensiteit geassocieerd met angst, woede, verdriet en vreugde in de tweet te voorspellen. We ontdekten dat het opnemen van de affectieve lexicons-gebaseerde functies het systeem in staat stelde om sterke voorspellingsresultaten te verkrijgen, terwijl het interessante emotie woord-niveau en boodschap-niveau associaties onthulde. Op gouden testgegevens verkregen CrystalFeel Pearson correlaties van 0.717 op gemiddelde emotie intensiteit en van 0.816 op sentiment intensiteit.', 'de': 'Während die Sentiment- und Emotionsanalyse eine beträchtliche Aufmerksamkeit der Forschung erhalten hat, ist der Begriff des Verstehens und Erkennens der Intensität von Emotionen relativ wenig erforscht. Diese Arbeit beschreibt ein System zur Vorhersage der Emotionsintensität in Tweets. Angesichts einer Twitter-Nachricht verwendet CrystalFeel Funktionen, die aus Sprachteilen, n-Grammen, Worteinbettung und mehreren affektiven Lexikonen abgeleitet werden, einschließlich Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion/Hash Emotion, und unser hauseigenes EI Lexicon, um den Grad der Intensität vorherzusagen, die mit Angst, Wut, Traurigkeit und Freude im Tweet verbunden ist. Wir fanden heraus, dass die Einbeziehung der affektiven lexikon-basierten Funktionen es dem System ermöglichte, eine starke Vorhersageleistung zu erzielen und gleichzeitig interessante Emotion-Wort- und Nachrichtenebene Assoziationen aufzudecken. Auf Goldtestdaten erhielt CrystalFeel Pearson Korrelationen von 0,717 auf der durchschnittlichen Emotionsintensität und von 0,816 auf der Sentiment Intensität.', 'id': 'Sementara analisis perasaan dan emosi telah menerima banyak perhatian penelitian, gagasan pemahaman dan mendeteksi intensitas emosi relatif kurang dikeksplorasi. Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang dikembangkan untuk memprediksi intensitas emosi dalam tweet. Mengingat pesan Twitter, CrystalFeel menggunakan ciri-ciri yang berasal dari bagian-dari-pidato, n-gram, pembangunan kata, dan berbagai leksikon afektif termasuk Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, dan dalam rumah kami mengembangkan EI Lexicon untuk memprediksi tingkat intensitas yang terkait dengan ketakutan, kemarahan, kesedihan, dan kegembiraan dalam tweet. Kami menemukan bahwa termasuk ciri-ciri berbasis lexikon yang afektif memungkinkan sistem untuk mendapatkan prestasi prediksi yang kuat, sementara mengungkap emosi menarik level kata dan level pesan asosiasi. Dalam data tes emas, CrystalFeel mendapatkan korelasi Pearson 0,717 pada intensitas emosi rata-rata dan 0,816 pada intensitas sentimen.', 'ko': '정서와 정서 분석은 이미 상당히 많은 연구의 관심을 받았지만 정서의 강도를 이해하고 측정하는 개념에 대한 탐구는 상대적으로 적다.본고는 추문의 정서적 강도를 예측하는 데 사용되는 시스템을 묘사한다.트위터 메시지를 주면 크리스탈 페어는 단어성, n-gram, 단어 삽입과 다양한 감정 어휘의 특징을 사용한다. 의견 어휘, Senti Strength,AFFIN,NRC 감정과 해시 감정, 그리고 우리 내부에서 개발한 EI 어휘를 사용하여 트위터에서 두려움, 분노, 슬픔과 즐거움과 관련된 강도를 예측한다.우리는 감정 어휘를 바탕으로 하는 특징을 포함하여 시스템이 강한 예측 성능을 얻을 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 흥미로운 감정 어휘급과 메시지 등급의 관련도 제시할 수 있음을 발견했다.골드 테스트 데이터에서 크리스탈펠이 얻은 필슨 상관계수는 평균 정서 강도가 0.717, 정서 강도가 0.816이었다.', 'sw': 'Wakati uchambuzi wa hisia na hisia umepokea kiasi kikubwa cha utafiti, dhana ya kuelewa na kutambua ongezeko la hisia ni kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi. Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo uliotengenezwa kwa kutabiri ongezeko la hisia kwenye twiti. Kwa kutumia ujumbe wa Twita, CrystalFeel anatumia vipengele vilivyotokana n a maeneo ya hotuba, n-gram, maneno yanayohusiana na watu wengi wenye madhara ikiwa ni pamoja na Opinion Lexicon, Kuongezeka Ujumbe, AFFIN, Uhisia wa NRC na Uhisia wa Hash, na Hatua zetu NRC zilizojenga nchini humo kutabiri kiwango cha kiwango kinachohusiana na hofu, hasira, na furaha katika twita. Tumegundua kwamba ikiwa ni pamoja na vipengele vilivyoathiri wa lexico viliruhusu mfumo kupata ufanisi mkubwa wa kutabiri, wakati wakionyesha jumuiya za hisia za kiwango cha maneno na kiwango cha ujumbe. Katika taarifa za majaribio ya dhahabu, CrystalFeel ilipata mahusiano ya Pearson ya 0.717 kwa kiwango cha wastani cha hisia na kwa kiwango cha 0.816 cha hisia.', 'fa': 'در حالی که تحلیل احساسات و احساسات یک مقدار زیادی توجه تحقیقات را دریافت کرده است، نظر درک و کشف شدت احساسات نسبتا کمتر تحقیق شده است. این کاغذ یک سیستم توسعه شده برای پیش بینی شدت احساسات در توئیت توصیف می کند. با توجه به پیغام توئیتر، کریستالفیل از ویژه\u200cهایی استفاده می\u200cکند که از بخش\u200cهای سخنرانی، n-گرم، کلمه\u200cهای داخل شدن، و کلمه\u200cهای متفاوت تأثیر می\u200cکنند، شامل تأثیر تأثیر، لکسیون، SentiStrength، AFFIN، Emotion NRC & Hash، و در خانه\u200cی ما آموخته شده است تا درجه intensity ارتباط با ترس، خشم، غمگین و شادی ما فهمیدیم که شامل ویژگی\u200cهایی که بر اساس زبان\u200cهای تاثیر دارند به سیستم اجازه می\u200cدهند که عملکرد پیش\u200cبینی قوی را دریافت کند، در حالی که ارتباط\u200cهای طبقه\u200cی احساسات جالب و سطح\u200cی پیام\u200cها را نشا در اطلاعات آزمایش طلایی، کریستالفیل ارتباطات پیرسون 0.717 در میانگین شدت احساسات و 0.816 در میانگین شدت احساسات دریافت کرد.', 'sq': 'While sentiment and emotion analysis has received a considerable amount of research attention, the notion of understanding and detecting the intensity of emotions is relatively less explored.  Kjo letër përshkruan një sistem të zhvilluar për parashikimin e intensitetit emocional në tweet. Duke u dhën ë një mesazh në Twitter, CrystalFeel përdor karakteristika të nxjerra nga pjesë-të-fjalimit, n-gram, përfshirje e fjalëve, dhe lexikona të shumta afektive duke përfshirë Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, dhe brenda ne kemi zhvilluar EI Lexicons për të parashikuar shkallën e intensitetit të lidhur me frikën, zemërimin, trishtimin dhe gëzimin në tweet. We found that including the affective lexicons-based features allowed the system to obtain strong prediction performance, while revealing interesting emotion word-level and message-level associations.  Në të dhënat e testit të artë, CrystalFeel mori korrelacione me Pearson 0.717 në intensitetin mesatar të emocioneve dhe 0.816 në intensitetin e ndjenjave.', 'am': 'የስሜት እና የአሳብ ትምህርት ትምህርት በሚያበዛ ጊዜ፣ ማስተዋል እና የአሳብ ግንኙነት ማሳየት በኩል በጣም ትንሽ የሚመረመር ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የስብሰባውን ጉዳይ ለመፍጠር የተዘጋጀውን ስርዓት በትዊተሮች ይናገራል፡፡ በትዊተር መልዕክት በተሰጠ ጊዜ ክርስቴልፌል ከንግግር፣ ከ-ግራም፣ ቃላት ግንኙነት፣ ከኦፊኒዮን ሌክሲኮን፣ ሰንቲኃይል፣ አፍፊን፣ የNRC Emotion እና ሐሽ ኢትዮጵያ እና በቤታችን የኢሜይል ሊክሲኮኖችን በፍርሃት፣ ቁጣ፣ ኀዘን እና ሐሤት እና ሐሤትን ለመቀበል እና በትዊተር ላይ የተጠቃሚ የግንኙነት ግንኙነትን ለመቀበል ይቻላል፡፡ አግኝተናል፡፡ On gold test data, CrystalFeel obtained Pearson correlations of 0.717 on average emotion intensity and of 0.816 on sentiment intensity.', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ զգացմունքների և զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը շատ ուշադրություն է ստացել հետազոտությունների վրա, զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության հասկացության և հայտնաբերման գաղափարը համեմատաբար ավելի քիչ է ուսումնասիրում: This paper describes a system developed for predicting emotion intensity in tweets.  Թվիթերի հաղորդագրության արդյունքում, ՔրիստալՖուլսը օգտագործում է խոսքի մասերից, n-գրամերից, բառերի ներգրավման և բազմաթիվ աֆեկտիվ լեքսիկոններից ստացված առանձնահատկություններ, ներառյալ կարծիքը՝ Կարծություն Լեքսիկոնը, Senti-Սուրբը, ԱֆՖԻնն, ՆՌԿ-ի զգացմունքները և Հաշվի զգացմունքները, և մեր ներքին ընկերությունը զարգա Մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ ներառյալ էֆեկտիվ լեքսիկոնների հիմնված հատկությունները թույլ տվեցին համակարգին հասնել ուժեղ կանխատեսման արտադրողության, միաժամանակ բացահայտելով հետաքրքիր զգացմունքների բառերի և հաղորդագրությունների Ոսկու փորձարկումների արդյունքում, ՔրիստալՖեյլը ստացավ Փարսոնի հարաբերությունները 0.717-ի միջին զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության և 0.816-ի զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության վրա:', 'bn': 'অনুভূতি এবং আবেগ বিশ্লেষণের পরিমাণ গবেষণার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি পেয়েছে, কিন্তু অনুভূতির গবেষণার ধারণা বুঝতে এবং আবেগের শক্তি আবিষ্কার করা This paper describes a system developed for predicting emotion intensity in tweets.  টুইটারের বার্তা দিয়ে ক্রিস্টাল ফেল ভাষণের অংশ, ন-গ্রাম, শব্দ বিভিন্ন প্রভাবিত এবং বেশ কয়েকটি লেক্সিকোর ব্যবহার করেছে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে অপিনিয়ন লেক্সিকোন, সেন্টিস্ট্রোট, এফএফিন, এনআরিসি ইমোটিশন এবং হাশ Emotion এবং আমাদের ঘ আমরা পেয়েছি যে প্রভাবিত লেক্সিকোন ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে রয়েছে শক্তিশালী ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী প্রদর্শনের অনুমতি প্রদান করার জন্য সিস্ট On gold test data, CrystalFeel obtained Pearson correlations of 0.717 on average emotion intensity and of 0.816 on sentiment intensity.', 'af': "Terwyl sentiment en emosie analisie 'n aansienlike hoeveelheid ondersoek aandag ontvang het, is die verstanding van verstanding en die intensiteit van emosies relativief minder ondersoek. Hierdie papier beskrywe 'n stelsel ontwikkeld vir voorskou van emosie intensiteit in tweets. Gien 'n Twitter boodskap, CrystalFeel gebruik funksies afgeleide van dele-van-spreek, n-grame, woord inbetering en veelvuldige effektiewe leksies insluitend Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, en ons in-huis het EI Lexicons ontwikkel om die grad van die intensiteit geassosieer met vrees, toorn, bedroef en blydskap in die tweet te voorskou. Ons het gevind dat insluitend die effektiewe lexicons-gebaseerde funksies die stelsel toegelaat het om sterk voorskou-presisie te kry, terwyl die interessante emosie woord-vlak en boodskapvlak-assosiasies vertoon word. Op goud toets data het CrystalFeel Pearson korrelasies van 0.717 ontvang op gemiddelde emosie intensiteit en van 0.816 op sentiment intensiteit.", 'ca': "Mentre que l'anàlisi de sentiments i emocions ha rebut una gran quantitat d'atenció a la recerca, la noció d'entendre i detectar la intensitat de les emocions és relativament menys explorada. Aquest article descriu un sistema desenvolupat per predir la intensitat emocional en els tweets. Dat un missatge de Twitter, CrystalFeel utilitza característiques derivades de parts-of-speech, n-grams, word embedding, i múltiples lexicons afectius, incloent Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, i el nostre intern ha desenvolupat EI Lexicons per predir el grau d'intensitat associada a por, ira, tristesa i alegria en el tweet. Vam descobrir que incloure les característiques afectives basades en els lexicòns va permetre al sistema aconseguir un fort desempeny de predicció, revelant al mateix temps interessants nivells d'emoció de paraules i de missatges. En les dades d'exàmens d'or, CrystalFeel va obtenir correlacions de Pearson de 0,717 en intensitat emocional mitjana i de 0,816 en intensitat sentimental.", 'cs': 'Zatímco analýza sentimentů a emocí získala značnou pozornost výzkumu, pojem porozumění a detekce intenzity emocí je relativně méně zkoumán. Tento článek popisuje systém vyvinutý pro predikci intenzity emocí ve tweetech. Vzhledem ke zprávě na Twitteru CrystalFeel používá funkce odvozené z částí řeči, n-gramů, vložení slov a několika afektivních slovníků včetně Lexikonu názoru, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion a Hash Emotion a naše vlastní vyvinuté EI Lexikony k předpovědi stupně intenzity spojené se strachem, hněvem, smutkem a radostí ve tweetu. Zjistili jsme, že zahrnutí funkcí založených na afektivních lexikonech umožnilo systému získat silný predikční výkon a zároveň odhalit zajímavé emoční asociace slova na úrovni a zprávy. Na základě zlatých testů získala CrystalFeel Pearsonova korelace 0,717 na průměrné intenzitě emocí a 0,816 na intenzitě sentimentu.', 'az': "Duygusallıq və emosiyal analizi çox dərəcə araşdırma dikkatini aldığı halda, düşünüb, duyguların a ğırlığını keşfetməsi relatively az keşfedilmişdir. Bu kağıt twetlərdə duygusal a ğırlığı tədbir etmək üçün hazırlanmış sistemi təsbir edir. Twitter ə ismarışı ilə CrystalFeel sözlərin, n-gramların, sözlərin içərisindən və çoxlu təsirli sözlərin istifadəsindən istifadə edir. Buna görə də Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, və evlərimizin EI Lexicons təşkil etdi ki, qorxu, qəzəblənməsi, kədərlənməsi və tweetdə sevinmək üçün çoxlu təsirli sözlər təşkil etdi. Biz öyrəndik ki, təsirlərin təsirlərindən istifadə edilən təsirlərin istifadəsində sistemin qüvvətli təsirlərin performansını almasına imkan verir, məsələlər səviyyəsində və məsələlər səviyyəsində maraqlı təsirlərini göstərərlər. Altın sınama məlumatlarında CrystalFeel ortalama emosyon ağırlığında 0,717 Pearson'un bağlantılarını və hisslərin ağırlığında 0,816 aldı.", 'et': 'Kuigi tunde- ja emotsioonianalüüs on saanud märkimisväärse hulga uurimistähelepanu, on emotsioonide intensiivsuse mõistmise ja tuvastamise mõiste suhteliselt vähem uuritud. Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse süsteemi, mis on välja töötatud emotsioonide intensiivsuse ennustamiseks säutsides. Twitteri sõnumit arvestades kasutab CrystalFeel funktsioone, mis tulenevad kõneosadest, n-grammidest, sõna manustamisest ja mitmest afektiivsest leksikonist, sealhulgas arvamusleksikonist, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, ning meie ettevõttesiseselt välja töötatud EI Lexiconid, et ennustada hirmu, viha, kurbuse ja rõõmuga seotud intensiivsuse määra säutsis. Leidsime, et affektiivsetel leksikonidel põhinevate funktsioonide kaasamine võimaldas süsteemil saavutada tugevat prognoositavust, paljastades samas huvitavaid emotsioonilisi sõna- ja sõnumitaseme seoseid. Kuldtestide andmetel saavutas CrystalFeel Pearsoni korrelatsioonid keskmiselt 0,717 emotsioonide intensiivsuse ja 0,816 emotsioonide intensiivsuse kohta.', 'tr': "Duýgyş we duýgyş analyzasy araşdyrymyň has gowy görnüşi aldy bolsa hem, duýgynyň görnüşi we çykyşyň gaty kynçylygyny gözlemek ukypdyr. Bu kagyz tweets içinde duýgular kynçylygy önlemek üçin gelişmiş sistemany tassyklaýar. Twitter haty görkezilýän bolsa, CrystalFeel gepleşik bölümlerden, n-gramlaryň, sözleriň daşary bolan sözleriň we köp n äçe täsirli leksiýanlardan soňra Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion we öýümizde EI Leksikanlaryň gorky, gaharlyk, gaýgylyk we baglyk bilen baglanyşyklaryň derejesini öňden çykýar. Biz takyk etdik ki sözleriň daýanýan özellikleri sistemiň güýçli tahmin etmek üçin güýçli tahmin etmek üçin, gyzykly duýgym sözleriň derejesini we mesaj derejesini görkezýärler. Altyn synaglarynda CrystalFeel Pearson'yň 0.717 derejesinde orta duýgynyň ýigrenligi we 0.816 derejesinde duýgym ýigrenligi bar.", 'fi': 'Tunteiden ja tunteiden analysointiin on kiinnitetty paljon huomiota, mutta tunteiden voimakkuuden ymmärtämisen ja havaitsemisen käsitettä tutkitaan suhteellisen vähän. Tämä artikkeli kuvaa järjestelmää, joka on kehitetty ennustamaan tunteiden voimakkuutta tweeteissä. Twitterissä CrystalFeel käyttää ominaisuuksia, jotka on johdettu puheen osista, n-grammista, sanan upottamisesta ja useista affektiivisistä sanastoista, mukaan lukien Mielipiteen Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, ja oman yrityksen kehittämät EI Lexiconit ennustamaan pelkoon, vihaan, suruun ja iloon liittyvän intensiteetin tweetissä. Havaitsimme, että affektiivisten leksikonien ominaisuuksien avulla järjestelmä pystyi saavuttamaan vahvan ennustesuorituskyvyn ja paljastamaan mielenkiintoisia tunteiden sanatason ja sanomatason yhteyksiä. CrystalFeel sai kultatestiaineistosta Pearsonin korrelaatiot 0,717 tunteiden intensiteetillä ja 0,816 tunteiden intensiteetillä.', 'bs': 'Iako je analiza sentiment a i emocija dobila značajnu količinu istraživanja, pojma razumijevanja i otkrivanja intenziteta emocija je relativno manje istražena. Ovaj papir opisuje sistem razvijen za predviđanje intenziteta emocija u tweetima. S obzirom n a tvitersku poruku, CrystalFeel koristi karakteristike iz dijelova govora, n-grama, ugrađenja riječi i višestruke utjecajne leksione uključujući Leksion, SentiStrength, AFFIN, Emotion NRC i Hash emocije, i n a ša unutrašnja leksija razvila su EI leksije kako bi predvidjela stepen intenzitete povezane sa strahom, besom, tugom i radošću u tweetu. Pronašli smo da uključujući utjecajne karakteristike na temelju leksikona omogućavaju sistemu da dobije jake predviđanje, dok otkrivaju zanimljive udruženje na nivou riječi i nivou poruke. Na zlatnim testovima, CrystalFeel je dobio korelaciju Pearsona od 0,717 na prosječnoj intenziteti emocija i od 0,816 na intenzitet osjećaja.', 'jv': 'Nanging ketahane sampeyan karo dipalamat sampeyan luwih dumadhi, kuwi nggunakake punika ingkang dipatensak karo ingkang dipenesir kuwi dudu, kuwi mau Perintah iki dadi sistem sing nyupir banget kanggo ngerasakno éneng pisan banget. Dino kesalahan Tom seneng pisar, cristalFel iso nggambar kelas telu tanggal gak-tanggal, n-gram, gambar embedding, lan kashukan sing wis dipune gak dhéwé gambar nggambar bekanye OPINCIL Leksion, Senti strength, ASFN, NPN emuation lan hash emuation, lan uwong sing dumadhi éwé nggawe eI Leksion iki dadi kanggo ngerasahan kanggo ngerasahan kanggo ngilanggar terus, wis gak, njuk lan ijol-ijol sing nganggo kuwi tuwit. Awak dhéwé wis ngerasakno karo akeh luwih-luwih sing basa gambar ning sistem iso nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan, uga iso nglanggar aturan omongaké gambar kelas lan soko perusahaan-langar message. Ndawak dhéwé kuwi, cristalFel iki bakal ono melalaman pergsun 0.7 karo hal-hal sing dirampakan karo 0.8 sing dirampakan.', 'sk': 'Medtem ko je analiza čustev in čustev prejela precej raziskovalne pozornosti, je pojem razumevanja in zaznavanja intenzivnosti čustev relativno manj raziskan. V prispevku je opisan sistem za napovedovanje intenzivnosti čustev v tweetih. Ob upoštevanju Twitterjevega sporočila CrystalFeel uporablja funkcije, ki izhajajo iz delov govora, n-gramov, vključevanja besed in več afektivnih leksikonov, vključno z mnenjskim leksikonom, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, in naša lastna hiša razvila EI Lexicone za napovedovanje stopnje intenzivnosti, povezane s strahom, jezo, žalostjo in veseljem v tweetu. Ugotovili smo, da vključitev funkcij, ki temeljijo na afektivnih leksikonih, omogoča sistemu doseganje močne napovedi, hkrati pa je razkrila zanimive čustvene povezave besedno-ravni in sporočilo-ravni. Na podlagi zlatih testnih podatkov je CrystalFeel dobil Pearsonove korelacije 0,717 v povprečni intenzivnosti čustev in 0,816 v intenzivnosti čustev.', 'he': 'בעוד ניתוח הרגשות והרגשות קיבלו כמות משמעותית של תשומת לב מחקר, הרעיון להבין ולגלות את אינטנסיבות הרגשות הוא יחסית פחות חוקר. העיתון הזה מתאר מערכת שפותחת כדי לחזות אינטנסיבות רגשות בטוויטים. בהתחשב בהודעה לטוויטר, CrystalFeel משתמש במיוחדים שנוצרים מחלקים של הנאום, n-גרם, מילים קישום, ולקסיקונים חיוביים מרובים כולל דעה לקסיקון, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, והפנים שלנו פיתחו EI Lexicons כדי לחזות את מדרגת האינטנסיבות הקשורה לפחד, כעס, עצב ושמחה בטוויטר. מצאנו שכולל המאפיינים המבוססים על לקסיקונים החשיבים אפשרו למערכת להשיג ביצועים חזקים של צפייה, בזמן שחשף איגודים מעניינים של רגשות רמת מילים ורמת הודעות. על נתוני מבחן זהב, קריסטלפייל השיגה קשרים של פירסון של 0.717 בעוצמה רגשית ממוצעת ו-0.816 בעוצמה רגשית.', 'bo': 'སེམས་ཚོར་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་བའི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ་ཡིན། Given a Twitter message, CrystalFeel uses features derived from parts-of-speech, n-grams, word embedding, and multiple affective lexicons including Opinion Lexicon, SentiStrength, AFFIN, NRC Emotion & Hash Emotion, and our in-house developed EI Lexicons to predict the degree of the intensity associated with fear, anger, sadness, and joy in the tweet. ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱིས་མ་ལག་གི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཡོད་པའི་རྐྱེན་རིས་རྟོགས་དང་། སྐྱེན་རིས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་ Gold test data ཐོག་ཏུ། CrystalFeel ཡིས་0.717 ཐད་ཀར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད།', 'ha': "A lokacin da an yi anaƙayyade hisia da hisia sai ya motsa gwargwadon muhimmin muhimmi wa aikin aiki, fikon fahimci da gane kashin hisãbi na ƙaranci. Wannan takardan na faɗa ɗa wata na'urar da aka buɗe shi dõmin ka yi bayani ga kashi na hisia a cikin Twitter. Gida wani manzo n a Twitter, KristalFeel yana amfani da wasu mistakardu wanda aka samu daga shekarar-hotuba, n-gram, word embedding, da wasu masu hushi masu amfani da shi kamar shirin Leksikon, Setiƙarfi, AFFIN, NRC Emissionon & Hash Emissionon, da kuma an developer a cikin gidan EI Leksikon don su yi bayani ga daraja ta haɗi da tsõro, haske, baƙin ciki, da kuma fari a cikin Twitter. Mun gane cewa, idan an sami wasu mistakardar leksisini masu yin amfani da shi, sai ya yarda na'urar ta sami tsarin basĩri mai ƙarfi, a lokacin da za'a nuna masu sha'awa da maganar-daraja da shirin da ke cikin jumla. Daga data na jarraba gulĩno, KristalFeel ya sãmu Pearson na haɗi na 0.717 a kan tsakanin hisoyi da ke sauri 0.816 a kan kashi."}
{'en': 'PlusEmo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Exploiting emotion knowledge from emoji and # hashtags', 'ar': 'PlusEmo2Vec في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: استغلال المعرفة العاطفية من الرموز التعبيرية و # الهاشتاج', 'ja': 'PlusEmo 2 Vec at SemEval -2018タスク1 ：絵文字と#ハッシュタグから感情の知識を活用する', 'zh': 'PlusEmo2VecÕ£©SemEval-2018ÕŖĪ1:Õł®ńö©ĶĪ©µāģń¼”ÕÅĘ#hashtags', 'fr': "PlusEmo2vec à SemEval-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Exploiter la connaissance des émotions à partir d'emoji et de #hashtags", 'pt': 'PlusEmo2Vec na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Explorando o conhecimento emocional de emojis e #hashtags', 'ru': 'PlusEmo2Vec на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Использование эмоциональных знаний из эмодзи и #хэштегов', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर PlusEmo2Vec: इमोजी और #hashtags से भावना ज्ञान का शोषण', 'es': 'PlusEMO2VEC en Semeval-2018 Tarea 1: Explotar el conocimiento de las emociones de emoji y #hashtags', 'ga': 'PlusEmo2Vec ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Leas a bhaint as eolas mothúcháin ó emoji agus #hashtags', 'it': 'PlusEmo2Vec a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Sfruttare la conoscenza delle emozioni da emoji e #hashtag', 'kk': 'PlusEmo2Vec at semiEval-2018 Task 1: emoji and #hashtags', 'lt': 'PlusEmo2Vec SemEval-2018 1 užduotis: emocijų žinių panaudojimas iš emoji ir #hashtags', 'mk': 'PlusEmo2Vec на SemEval-2018 задача 1: искористување на емоционално знаење од emoji и #hashtags', 'ms': 'PlusEmo2Vec di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Menggunakan pengetahuan emosi dari emoji dan #hashtags', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ പ്ലാസ്എമോവി2വിക്: ഇമോജിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഹാഷ്ട്ടാഗുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വികാരങ്ങളുടെ അറിവ് പ്', 'mt': "PlusEmo2Vec f'SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: L-isfruttar tal-għarfien emozzjonali minn emoji u #hashtags", 'mn': 'Plus Emo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: emoji and #hashtags', 'no': 'PlusEmo2Vec ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Utforskar følelseskjenning frå emoji og #hashtag', 'pl': 'PlusEmo2Vec na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Wykorzystanie wiedzy emocji z emoji i #hashtagów', 'ro': 'PlusEmo2Vec la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Exploatarea cunoștințelor emoționale din emoji și #hashtaguri', 'sr': 'Plus Emo2Vec na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Eksploziranje emocija znanja emoji i #hashtags', 'si': 'PlusEmo2Vec at Half-2018 Job 1: Exploiting emoji and #hashtags from emoji and #hashtags', 'so': 'PlusEmo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Extensing aqoon of emoji and #hashtags', 'sv': 'PlusEmo2Vec på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Utnyttja känslokunskap från emoji och #hashtags', 'ta': 'Я«џЯ»єЯ««Я»ЇEval- 2018 Я«фЯ«БЯ«┐', 'ur': 'پالس Emo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: emoji and #hashtags', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Εκμετάλλευση της γνώσης συναισθημάτων από emoji και #hashtags', 'ka': 'PlusEmo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Exploiting emotion knowledge from emoji and #hashtags', 'hu': 'PlusEmo2Vec a SemEval-2018-on 1. feladat: Az emoji és #hashtags érzelmi ismereteinek kihasználása', 'uz': 'PlusEmo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Exploiting emotion knowledge from emoji and #hashtags', 'vi': 'Bổ tinh Emo2Vev tại SemEvl-208 Task 1: bộc phát kiến thức cảm xúc từ biểu tượng và\\ 35;hashtatags', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Използване на емоционалното познание от емоджи и #хаштагове', 'da': 'PlusEmo2Vec på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Udnyttelse af følelsesviden fra emoji og #hashtags', 'de': 'PlusEmo2Vec bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Emotionswissen aus Emoji und #hashtags nutzen', 'id': 'PlusEmo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Exploiting emotion knowledge from emoji and #hashtags', 'hr': 'PlusEmo2Vec na semiEval-2018 zadatak 1: Iskoristavanje emocija znanja emoji i #hashtags', 'ko': 'PlusEmo2Vec가SemEval-18퀘스트1: 이모티콘과 #라벨의 감정지식을 활용', 'nl': 'PlusEmo2Vec op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Exploiteren van emotiekennis uit emoji en #hashtags', 'af': 'Plus Emo2Vec by SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Voorskou emosie kennis van emoji en #hashtags', 'sw': 'PlusEmo2Vec katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Kueneza maarifa ya hisia kutoka emoji na alama habari za #hashtags', 'tr': 'PlusEmo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: emotion knowledge from emoji and #hashtags', 'am': 'ስራ 1: emoji እና #hashtags', 'fa': 'PlusEmo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Exploiting emotion knowledge from emoji and #hashtags', 'az': 'PlusEmo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: emoji and #hashtags emoji knowledge Exploiting', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sq': 'PlusEmo2Vec në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Shfrytëzimi i njohurive emocionale nga emoji dhe #hashtags', 'cs': 'PlusEmo2Vec na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Využití emočních znalostí z emoji a #hashtagů', 'bs': 'Plus Emo2Vec na pola Evala-2018 Task 1: Eksploziranje emocija znanja emoji i #hashtags', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১-এ প্লাসএমো২ভেক: ইমোজি এবং #হ্যাশট্যাগ থেকে আবেগের জ্ঞান বিস্তার করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'PlusEmo2Vec SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: emotsioonide teadmiste ärakasutamine emojist ja #hashtagist', 'fi': 'PlusEmo2Vec SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Tunteiden tuntemuksen hyödyntäminen emojista ja #hashtageista', 'ca': "PlusEmo2Vec a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Exploitar el coneixement emocional a partir d'emoji i #hashtags", 'jv': 'Multiple', 'he': 'PlusEmo2Vec ב SemEval-2018 Task 1: Exploiting emotion knowledge from emoji and #hashtags', 'sk': 'PlusEmo2Vec na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Izkoriščanje znanja čustev iz emojijev in #hashtagov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'PlusEmo2Vec at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Exploiting emotion knowledge from emoji and #hashtags'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system that has been submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Affect in Tweets (AIT) to solve five subtasks. We focus on modeling both sentence and word level representations of emotion inside texts through large distantly labeled corpora with emojis and hashtags. We transfer the emotional knowledge by exploiting neural network models as feature extractors and use these representations for traditional machine learning models such as support vector regression (SVR) and logistic regression to solve the competition tasks. Our system is placed among the Top3 for all subtasks we participated.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا الذي تم تقديمه إلى SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: التأثير في التغريدات (AIT) لحل خمس مهام فرعية. نحن نركز على نمذجة كل من تمثيلات على مستوى الجملة والكلمة للعاطفة داخل النصوص من خلال مجموعة كبيرة ذات علامات بعيدة مع رموز تعبيرية وعلامات تصنيف. نقوم بنقل المعرفة العاطفية من خلال استغلال نماذج الشبكة العصبية كمستخلصات للميزات واستخدام هذه التمثيلات لنماذج التعلم الآلي التقليدية مثل دعم الانحدار المتجه (SVR) والانحدار اللوجستي لحل مهام المنافسة. تم تصنيف نظامنا بين Top3 لجميع المهام الفرعية التي شاركنا فيها.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système qui a été soumis à SEMEval-2018 Task 1\xa0: Affect in Tweets (AIT) pour résoudre cinq sous-tâches. Nous nous concentrons sur la modélisation de représentations d'émotions au niveau des phrases et des mots à l'intérieur de textes au moyen de grands corpus étiquetés de manière distante avec des emojis et des hashtags Nous transférons les connaissances émotionnelles en exploitant les modèles de réseaux neuronaux comme extracteurs de caractéristiques et utilisons ces représentations pour les modèles d'apprentissage automatique traditionnels tels que la régression vectorielle de support (SVR) et la régression logistique afin de résoudre les tâches de compétition. Notre système est classé parmi les 3 meilleurs pour toutes les sous-tâches auxquelles nous avons participé.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema que foi submetido ao SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Afeto em Tweets (AIT) para resolver cinco subtarefas. Nós nos concentramos em modelar representações de emoção em nível de frase e palavra dentro de textos por meio de grandes corpora rotulados à distância com emojis e hashtags. Transferimos o conhecimento emocional explorando modelos de redes neurais como extratores de recursos e usamos essas representações para modelos tradicionais de aprendizado de máquina, como regressão vetorial de suporte (SVR) e regressão logística para resolver as tarefas de competição. Nosso sistema está entre os Top3 para todas as subtarefas que participamos.', 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro sistema que se envió a la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Efecto en los Tweets (AIT) para resolver cinco subtareas. Nos enfocamos en modelar representaciones de emociones a nivel de oración y palabra dentro de los textos a través de grandes cuerpos etiquetados a distancia con emojis y hashtags. Transferimos el conocimiento emocional mediante la explotación de modelos de redes neuronales como extractores de características y utilizamos estas representaciones para modelos tradicionales de aprendizaje automático, como la regresión vectorial de soporte (SVR) y la regresión logística para resolver las tareas de la competencia. Nuestro sistema se encuentra entre los 3 primeros en todas las subtareas en las que participamos.', 'ja': '本稿では、5つのサブタスクを解決するためにSemEval -2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT)に提出されたシステムについて説明します。私たちは、絵文字とハッシュタグを備えた大きな遠隔ラベルのコーパを通じて、テキスト内の感情の文章レベルと単語レベルの表現の両方をモデリングすることに焦点を当てています。私たちは、ニューラルネットワークモデルを特徴抽出器として利用することによって感情的な知識を転送し、これらの表現を、サポートベクトル回帰（ SVR ）やロジスティック回帰などの従来の機械学習モデルに使用して、競合タスクを解決します。当社のシステムは、参加したすべてのサブタスクでトップ3に入っています。', 'zh': '本文引臣等已付SemEval-2018务1之统:推文之化(AIT),以决五子之务。 注于表情符号、大远程语料库,对文本情句、单词级建模之。 吾因神经网络以为提取器以移情知,施于旧机器,若扶向量归(SVR),以决争务。 我们的系统在我们所有子务中都排列在前三名之列。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हमारे सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जिसे SemEval-2018 टास्क 1 में सबमिट किया गया है: पांच उप-कार्यों को हल करने के लिए ट्वीट्स (एआईटी) में प्रभाव। हम इमोजी और हैशटैग के साथ बड़े दूर के लेबल वाले कॉर्पोरेट के माध्यम से ग्रंथों के अंदर भावनाओं के वाक्य और शब्द स्तर के प्रतिनिधित्व दोनों को मॉडलिंग पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हम सुविधा चिमटा के रूप में तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल का शोषण करके भावनात्मक ज्ञान को स्थानांतरित करते हैं और प्रतियोगिता कार्यों को हल करने के लिए समर्थन वेक्टर प्रतिगमन (एसवीआर) और लॉजिस्टिक प्रतिगमन जैसे पारंपरिक मशीन लर्निंग मॉडल के लिए इन अभ्यावेदनों का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारे सिस्टम को हमारे द्वारा भाग लेने वाले सभी उप-कार्यों के लिए Top3 के बीच रखा गया है।', 'ru': 'В этом документе описывается наша система, которая была представлена SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) для решения пяти подзадач. Мы фокусируемся на моделировании эмоциональных представлений внутри текстов как на уровне предложений, так и на уровне слов через крупные дистанционно обозначенные корпуса с эмодзи и хэштегами. Мы передаем эмоциональные знания, используя модели нейронных сетей в качестве экстракторов признаков, и используем эти представления для традиционных моделей машинного обучения, таких как регрессия вектора поддержки (SVR) и логистическая регрессия для решения задач конкуренции. Наша система входит в тройку лучших для всех подзадач, в которых мы участвовали.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras atá curtha faoi bhráid SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) chun cúig fhothasc a réiteach. Dírímid ar shamhaltú léirithe ar leibhéal na habairte agus na bhfocal ar mhothúchán taobh istigh de théacsanna trí chorpra mór lipéadaithe i gcéin le emojis agus hashtags. Aistrímid an t-eolas mothúchánach trí leas a bhaint as samhlacha néarlíonra mar fháiscirí gné agus úsáidimid na huiríll seo le haghaidh samhlacha meaisínfhoghlama traidisiúnta mar aischéimniú veicteora tacaíochta (SVR) agus aischéimniú lóistíochta chun tascanna an chomórtais a réiteach. Cuirtear ár gcóras i measc na Top3 i gcás gach fothasc ar ghlac muid páirt ann.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) című rendszerünket öt altfeladat megoldására. Arra összpontosítunk, hogy a szövegeken belüli érzelmek mondatszintű és szószintű reprezentációit modellezzük nagy, távolról feliratozott corporákon keresztül emojis és hashtag-ekkel. Az érzelmi ismereteket a neurális hálózati modellek funkció extraktorként való kihasználásával továbbítjuk, és ezeket a reprezentációkat hagyományos gépi tanulási modellekhez használjuk, mint például a vektor regresszió (SVR) és logisztikai regresszió a versenyfeladatok megoldására. Rendszerünk az összes részfeladat Top3 közé kerül.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval-2018 დავალებულია 1. დავალება: Tweets-ში (AIT) გამოსახულება ხუთი საკუთარი საკუთარი განსახულებლად. ჩვენ ტექსტის შორის ემოციების და სიტყვების განსაზღვრებების მოდელურებაზე დავყენებთ, როგორც ძალიან განრგებულია, როგორც ემოიაზებით და ჰექტაქტებით. ჩვენ ემოციონალური ცნობილების გადატვირცეთ ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელების გამოყენებით როგორც ფუნქციების ექსტრეკტორიები და გამოყენებთ ეს რესპენტერებები ტრადიციოლური მაქინის სწავლების მოდელების გამო ჩვენი სისტემა Top3-ში დავყენება ყველა საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің жүйемізді біртінші жылдамдық-2018 тапсырмасына жіберілген 1- тапсырманы таңдайды: бес субсұранысты шешу үшін Tweets (AIT) жүйесіне әсер етеді. Біз мәтіндердің ішіндегі емоциялардың түсініктемелерін мен сөздер деңгейінің үлкен қашықтағы корпораға көңіл және хаттардың түсініктемелерін моделдеу үшін көң Біз эмоциялық білімдерді неврал желі үлгілерін экстракторлар ретінде жұмыс істеп, әдетті машиналық оқыту үлгілеріне, мысалы, вектор регрессиясын (SVR) қолдау мен логистикалық регрессиясын жасау үшін қолданамыз Біздің жүйеміз қатысушылар үшін Top3-ге орналасады.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema che è stato presentato a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) per risolvere cinque sottoattività. Ci concentriamo sulla modellazione di rappresentazioni di emozioni sia a livello di frase che di parola all'interno di testi attraverso corpora di grandi dimensioni etichettate a distanza con emoji e hashtag. Trasferiamo la conoscenza emotiva sfruttando modelli di rete neurale come estrattori di funzionalità e utilizziamo queste rappresentazioni per modelli tradizionali di machine learning come la regressione vettoriale di supporto (SVR) e la regressione logistica per risolvere i compiti della concorrenza. Il nostro sistema è inserito nella Top3 per tutte le sottoattività che abbiamo partecipato.", 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kami yang telah dihantar ke SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Kesan dalam Tweet (AIT) untuk menyelesaikan lima sub-tanya. Kami fokus pada modelkan kedua-dua kalimat dan perwakilan aras perkataan emosi di dalam teks melalui korpra besar yang ditabel jauh dengan emoji dan hashtag. Kami memindahkan pengetahuan emosional dengan mengeksploitasi model rangkaian saraf sebagai pengekstraktor ciri-ciri dan menggunakan perwakilan ini untuk model belajar mesin tradisional seperti regresi vektor (SVR) dan regresi logistik untuk menyelesaikan tugas pertandingan. Sistem kita ditempatkan di antara Top3 untuk semua subtasks yang kami berpartisipasi.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 1: അഞ്ചു സബ്ജിസ് പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പ വാക്കുകളും വാക്കുകളുടെ നില പ്രതിനിധികളും വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളും നാം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. പാഠങ്ങളിലൂടെയുള്ള വാക്കുകളിലൂട ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വികാരം മാറ്റുന്നു. പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഈ പ്രതി Our system is placed among the Top3 for all subtasks we participated.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем кој е поднесен на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Влијание на Твитовите (AIT) за решавање на пет потпрашања. Ние се фокусираме на моделирање на речениците и на речениците на нивото на зборовите на емоциите во текстовите преку големи оддалечени телефони со емоџии и хаштагови. Го пренесуваме емоционалното знаење со искористување на моделите на нервната мрежа како екстрактори на функции и ги користиме овие претставувања за традиционалните модели на машинско учење како што се поддршката на регресијата на векторите (СВР) и логистичката регресија за Нашиот систем е ставен меѓу Top3 за сите потпрашања кои учествувавме.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna li ġiet sottomessa lil SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affett in Tweets (AIT) biex jiġu solvuti ħames sottomistoqsijiet. Aħna niffokaw fuq l-immudellar kemm tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-livell tas-sentenza kif ukoll tal-kelma tal-emozzjoni ġewwa t-testi permezz ta’ korpura kbira bit-tikketta distanti b’emoji u hashtags. Aħna nittrasferixxu l-għarfien emozzjonali billi nisfruttaw mudelli tan-netwerk newrali bħala estratturi tal-karatteristiċi u nużaw dawn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet għal mudelli tradizzjonali tat-tagħlim tal-magni bħar-rigressjoni tal-vetturi ta’ appoġġ (SVR) u r-rigressjoni loġistika biex jissolvew il-kompiti tal-kompetizzjoni. Our system is placed among the Top3 for all subtasks we participated.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас биднийг SemEval-2018 Task 1-д өгсөн системийг тодорхойлж байна: таван суурь асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд Tweets (AIT) дээр нөлөөлдөг. Бид текст доторх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн харилцааны үг болон үг хэмжээний загварын загварын төвшинд анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг. Бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдлэгийг сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сүлжээний загваруудыг ашиглаж, эдгээр загваруудыг ашиглаж, эсрэг даалгаварын даалгаваруудыг шийдэхийн тулд уламжлалтын машин суралцах загваруудын тулд ашиглаж байна. Бидний систем бидний оролцсон бүх суурь асуултуудын тулд Top3-н дунд байрлаж байна.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system, który został przesłany do SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) w celu rozwiązania pięciu podzadań. Skupiamy się na modelowaniu zarówno na poziomie zdań, jak i słów reprezentacji emocji wewnątrz tekstów poprzez duże odległe korpusy z emoji i hashtagami. Przekazujemy wiedzę emocjonalną poprzez wykorzystanie modeli sieci neuronowych jako ekstraktorów cech i wykorzystujemy te reprezentacje do tradycyjnych modeli uczenia maszynowego, takich jak regresja wektorowa (SVR) i regresja logistyczna do rozwiązywania zadań konkurencyjnych. Nasz system znajduje się wśród Top3 dla wszystkich podzadań, w których uczestniczyliśmy.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru care a fost trimis la SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) pentru a rezolva cinci subactivități. Ne concentrăm pe modelarea atât a reprezentărilor la nivel de frază, cât și de cuvânt ale emoțiilor în interiorul textelor prin corpore mari etichetate la distanță cu emoji și hashtag-uri. Transferăm cunoștințele emoționale prin exploatarea modelelor de rețea neurală ca extractoare de caracteristici și folosim aceste reprezentări pentru modele tradiționale de machine learning, cum ar fi regresia vectorială (SVR) și regresia logistică pentru a rezolva sarcinile concurenței. Sistemul nostru este plasat în top3 pentru toate subactivitățile la care am participat.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama mūsų sistema, kuri buvo pateikta SemEval-2018 1 uždaviniui: Poveikis Tweetuose (AIT), siekiant išspręsti penkis paklausimus. Mes daugiausia dėmesio skiriame tiek sakinių, tiek žodžių lygio emocijų pavyzdžių modeliavimui tekstuose per didelę nuotoliniu ženklinimu pažymėtą korporą su emodžijomis ir hashtagomis. Perduodame emocines žinias naudojant nervinių tinklų modelius kaip savybių gavėjus ir naudojame šiuos rodmenis tradiciniams mašinų mokymosi modeliams, pvz., paramos vektorių regresijai (SVR) ir logistinei regresijai konkurencijos užduotims išspręsti. Mūsų sistema yra įtraukta į viršutinę 3 dalį visų mūsų dalyvavusių paklausymų.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩේ 1: ට්විට් වල (AIT) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පහක් විස්තර කරන්න. අපි වාක්ය සහ වචන ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා වචන ස්ථානයක් ලොකු දුරටත් ලේබල් කර්පෝරා සහ හැස්ටැග් එක්ක. අපි භාවිත දැනගන්නේ න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය මොඩල් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා මේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජ අපේ පද්ධතිය Top 3 එක්ක තියෙන්නේ අපි සම්පූර්ණ වෙනුවෙන් හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම වෙනුවෙන්.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem koji je podignut na zadatak 1 od polu Evala-2018: utjecaj na Tweets (AIT) za rešenje pet podataka. Fokusiramo se na modeliranje rečenice i razine rečenica predstavljanja emocija unutar teksta kroz veliku daleko označenu korporu sa emojima i hashtagama. Prebacujemo emocionalno znanje iskorištavajući neuralne mreže modele kao ekstraktore i koristimo te predstave za tradicionalne modele učenja mašina poput podrške vektorregresije (SVR) i logističke regresije kako bi riješili zadatak konkurencije. Naš sistem je postavljen među Top3 za sve podrške koje smo sudjelovali.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt som er sendt til halvEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Etter i Tweets (AIT) for å løysa fem underspørjingar. Vi fokuserer på å modellere både setningar og ordnivå representasjonar av følelser inne i tekstar gjennom stor distant merket korpora med emojis og hashtag. Vi overfører emosjonelle kunnskap ved å bruka neuralnettverksmodeller som funksjonsekstraktorar og bruka desse representasjonane for tradisjonelle maskinelæringsmodeller som støtte vektorregresjon (SVR) og logistiske regresjon for å løse konkurransa oppgåver. Systemet vårt er plassert blant Top3 for alle underspørsmål vi delta.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system som har skickats in till SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) för att lösa fem underuppgifter. Vi fokuserar på att modellera både menings- och ordnivårepresentationer av känslor inuti texter genom stora distansmärkta korpora med emojis och hashtags. Vi överför den emotionella kunskapen genom att utnyttja neurala nätverksmodeller som funktionsextraktorer och använder dessa representationer för traditionella maskininlärningsmodeller såsom support vector regression (SVR) och logistisk regression för att lösa tävlingsuppgifterna. Vårt system är placerat bland Top3 för alla deluppgifter vi deltog.', 'ta': 'SemEval-2018 பணிக்கு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட எங்கள் அமைப்பை இந்த காகிதத்தை விளக்குகிறது: ஐந்து துணை பணிகளை தீர்வு செய்ய வேண்டும். நாம் வாக்கு மற்றும் வார்த்தை மட்டத்திலும் உணர்வு நிலையை மாற்றுவதில் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம் பெரிய தூரத்தில் குறிப்பிடப நாம் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி இந்த குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி வழக்கமான இயந்திரம் கற்றல் மாதிரிகளுக்காக பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், நெறியின் கடுக்கத்தை ஆதரிக்க நாங்கள் பங்கிட்ட அனைத்து துணை பணிகளுக்கும் மேல்3ல் எங்கள் அமைப்பு வைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری سیسٹم کا مفصل بیان کرتا ہے جو SemEval-2018 ٹاکس ۱ پر پیش کیا گیا ہے: پانچ سٹسٹسٹ حل کے لئے ٹیوٹ (AIT) میں اثر ہے۔ ہم کلمات اور کلمات سطح کی مثالیں مثالوں کے درمیان ان احساسات کی نمودنی پر مہربانی کریں گے جو بہت دور سے لکھی ہوئی کورپورا کے ذریعہ emojis اور hashtags کے ساتھ ہے. ہم احساساتی علم کو نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کے مطابق استعمال کرنے کے ذریعہ استعمال کر رہے ہیں اور ان معجزات کو سنتی مشین یادہانی موڈل کے لئے استعمال کر رہے ہیں جیسے ویکتور regression (SVR) اور لوجیسٹی regression کے مطابق مسابقات کے کاموں کو حل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر ہمارا سیستم توپ 3 کے درمیان قرار دیا گیا ہے ہم نے سب کچھ شریک کیا ہے۔', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka loo dhiibay SemEval-2018 shaqo 1: Affect ku yaal Tweets (AIT) si ay u xajiso shan shabakad. Waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa sameynta dhamaanka hadalka iyo heerka hadalka ee iskuulka ku qoran qoraalka gudahooda ee qoraalka ku qoran qoraal aad u weyn oo ku qoran emojis iyo hashtagyo. Waxaannu ku bedelaynaa aqoonta fikrada ah sida qaababka shabakadda neurada, waxaana isticmaalnaa noocyada waxbarashada caadiga ah, tusaale ahaan kaalmeynta dib u celinta vector (SVR) iyo dib u celinta jimicsiga si aan u xallino shuqullada tartanka. nidaamkayaga waxaa lagu dhex dhigaa Top3 dhamaan shaqaalaha aan ka qeybqaaday.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας που έχει υποβληθεί στο έργο 1: Επίδραση στα tweets (για την επίλυση πέντε δευτερεύοντων εργασιών. Εστιάζουμε στη μοντελοποίηση τόσο σε επίπεδο προτάσεων όσο και σε επίπεδο λέξεων αναπαραστάσεων συναισθημάτων μέσα από κείμενα μέσα από μεγάλα μακρινά επισημασμένα σώματα με και hashtags. Μεταφέρουμε τη συναισθηματική γνώση αξιοποιώντας μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων ως εξαγωγείς χαρακτηριστικών και χρησιμοποιούμε αυτές τις αναπαραστάσεις για παραδοσιακά μοντέλα μηχανικής μάθησης όπως η οπισθοδρόμηση διανυσμάτων υποστήριξης (και η λογιστική παλινδρόμηση για την επίλυση των εργασιών ανταγωνισμού. Το σύστημά μας τοποθετείται στο Τοπ3 για όλες τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες που συμμετείχαμε.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống của chúng ta đã được gửi cho nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8: Đặt tác dụng trong Tweet (AIT) để giải quyết năm lần phụ đề. Chúng tôi tập trung vào việc mô tả cả bản án và các biểu tượng xúc cảm trên các văn bản thông qua thể loại được đánh dấu cách xa với biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng biểu tượng. Chúng tôi chuyển đổi kiến thức cảm xúc bằng cách khai thác các mô hình mạng thần kinh thành các bộ dẫn xuất và sử dụng các biểu tượng này cho các mô hình cổ máy truyền truyền thống như hỗ trợ sự phục hồi vector (SVR) và sự phục hồi hậu cần để giải quyết các nhiệm vụ cạnh tranh. Hệ thống của chúng tôi nằm trong top 3 cho tất cả các công cụ phụ chúng tôi tham gia.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval-2018 Vazifa 1: besh vazifalarni ҳал қилиш учун Twitterda Effekt (AIT) tizimimizni anglatadi. Biz emojis va hashtaglar bilan juda katta yozilgan kompaniya yordamida hisob va so'zlar darajasining ma'lumotlarini modellash uchun foydalanamiz. Biz neyural tarmoq modellarini o'zgartiraymiz va bu tashkilotlarni o'rganish modellaridan foydalanamiz. Vektor tizimini qoʻllash (SVR) va qiziqarish vazifalarini o'rganish uchun o'smirlarni o'rganish modellaridan foydalanamiz. Biz o'rganilgan hamma vazifalar uchun tizimmiz Top3 orqali qo'yilgan.", 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата система, която е изпратена на Задача 1: Въздействие в туитове (АИТ) за решаване на пет подзадачи. Фокусираме се върху моделирането както на изречения, така и на думи на емоциите в текстовете чрез големи дистанционно етикетирани корпори с емотикони и хаштагове. Прехвърляме емоционалните знания чрез използване на модели на невронни мрежи като екстрактори на функции и използваме тези представи за традиционни модели на машинно обучение като поддържаща векторна регресия (СВР) и логистична регресия за решаване на задачите на конкуренцията. Системата ни е поставена сред Топ3 за всички подзадачи, в които участвахме.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav koji je podignut zadatku 1 za pola Evala-2018: utjecaj na Tweets (AIT) za rješavanje pet podataka. Fokusiramo se na modeliranje rečenice i razine riječi predstavljanja emocija unutar teksta kroz veliku daleko označenu korporu s emojima i hashtagama. Prebacujemo emocionalno znanje iskorištavanjem modela neuralne mreže kao ekstraktore i koristimo te predstave za tradicionalne modele učenja strojeva poput podrške vektorregresije (SVR) i logističke regresije kako bi riješili zadatke natjecanja. Naš sustav je postavljen među Top3 za sve poduzeće koje smo učestvovali.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system, der er indsendt til SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Påvirke i tweets (AIT) for at løse fem underopgaver. Vi fokuserer på at modellere både sætning- og ordniveau repræsentationer af følelser inde i tekster gennem store fjernt mærkede corpora med emojis og hashtags. Vi overfører den følelsesmæssige viden ved at udnytte neurale netværksmodeller som feature extractors og bruger disse repræsentationer til traditionelle maskinlæringsmodeller såsom support vector regression (SVR) og logistisk regression til at løse konkurrenceopgaverne. Vores system er placeret blandt Top3 for alle underopgaver vi deltog i.', 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft ons systeem dat is ingediend bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) om vijf subtaken op te lossen. We richten ons op het modelleren van zowel zin- als woordniveau representaties van emotie in teksten door middel van grote afstandelijk gelabelde corpora's met emoji's en hashtags. We brengen de emotionele kennis over door neurale netwerkmodellen te gebruiken als feature extractors en gebruiken deze representaties voor traditionele machine learning modellen zoals support vector regressie (SVR) en logistieke regressie om de concurrentietaken op te lossen. Ons systeem staat onder de Top3 voor alle deeltaken waaraan we deelnamen.", 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt unser System, das an SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) eingereicht wurde, um fünf Teilaufgaben zu lösen. Wir konzentrieren uns auf die Modellierung von Emotionen in Texten auf Satz- und Wortebene durch große, distanziert beschriftete Korpora mit Emojis und Hashtags. Wir übertragen das emotionale Wissen, indem wir neuronale Netzwerkmodelle als Feature Extractor nutzen und nutzen diese Repräsentationen für traditionelle maschinelle Lernmodelle wie Support Vector Regression (SVR) und logistische Regression, um die Wettbewerbsaufgaben zu lösen. Unser System gehört zu den Top3 für alle Teilaufgaben, an denen wir teilgenommen haben.', 'id': 'This paper describes our system that has been submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) to solve five subtasks.  We focus on modeling both sentence and word level representations of emotion inside texts through large distantly labeled corpora with emojis and hashtags.  Kami memindahkan pengetahuan emosional dengan mengeksploitasi model jaringan saraf sebagai ekstraktor karakteristik dan menggunakan represensi ini untuk model belajar mesin tradisional seperti regresi vektor (SVR) dan regresi logistik untuk memecahkan tugas kompetisi. Sistem kita ditempatkan di antara Top3 untuk semua subtasks yang kami berpartisipasi.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18 퀘스트 1: 트윗의 영향(AIT)에 제출한 시스템을 묘사하여 다섯 개의 하위 퀘스트를 해결하고자 합니다.우리의 중점은 이모티콘과 라벨이 있는 대형 원거리 표기 자료 라이브러리를 통해 텍스트에서 감정의 문장과 단어급 표현을 모델링하는 것이다.우리는 신경 네트워크 모델을 특징 추출기로 삼아 감정 지식을 전달하고 이러한 표현을 벡터 회귀(SVR)와 논리 회귀 등 전통적인 기계 학습 모델을 지원하여 경쟁 임무를 해결하는 데 사용한다.우리의 시스템은 우리가 참여하는 모든 하위 임무 중 3위에 랭크되어 있다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu uliotumwa kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Madhara ya Twita (AIT) ili kutatua kazi tano. Tunakatiza kutengeneza hukumu na kiwango cha maneno cha hisia ndani ya maandishi kupitia kampuni kubwa yenye hisia na alama ishara za hisia. Tunamahamisha maarifa ya hisia kwa kutumia miundo ya mitandao ya kijamii kama vile wataalamu na kutumia maonesho haya kwa ajili ya mbinu za kujifunza za kitamaduni kama vile kuunga mkono ukandamizaji wa vector (SVR) na vikwazo vya kisiasa ili kutatua kazi za ushindani. Mfumo wetu umewekwa kati ya Top3 kwa ajili ya kazi zote tulizoshiriki.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier beskrywe ons stelsel wat aan SemEval- 2018 taak 1 ingestuur is: Afteken in Tweets (AIT) om vyf subtaske te los. Ons fokus op die modellering van selfde en woord vlak voorstellings van emosie binne-in teks deur groot afgeleë gemerkte korpora met emojis en hashtags. Ons oordra die emosionele kennis deur neural netwerk modele as funksie uitpakers te gebruik en hierdie voorstellings gebruik vir tradisionele masjien leer modele soos ondersteun vektor regresie (SVR) en logistike regresie om die rekenaar opdragte te los. Ons stelsel is gestel onder die Top3 vir alle subtaske wat ons gedeel het.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را توصیف می\u200cکند که به کار ۱ نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ ارسال شده است: اثر در Tweets (AIT) برای حل پنج زیر سؤال است. ما تمرکز می کنیم بر نمونه\u200cهای جمله\u200cها و سطح کلمه\u200cها از احساسات داخل متن\u200cها از طریق شرکت\u200cهای بزرگ و دور با احساسات و hashtags. ما دانش احساساتی را با استفاده از مدل شبکه عصبی به عنوان خارج کننده\u200cهای ویژه استفاده می\u200cکنیم و از این نمایش\u200cهایی برای مدل یادگیری ماشین سنتی مثل پشتیبانی بازگشت ویکتور (SVR) و بازگشت لوژیک برای حل مسابقه استفاده می\u200cکنیم. سیستم ما در میان توپ 3 قرار گرفته است برای تمام زیر خواسته\u200cهایی که شرکت کردیم.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň sistemimizi SemEval-2018 Göreve 1: Tweets (AIT) üçin beş süýtgeşik çözmek üçin janlaşdyrylýar. Biz hem sözleri hem kelime seviyelerini de metinlerin içindeki duyguların örgütlerini emojis hem etiketlerle örgütlendirmeye odaklanıyoruz. Nural ağ modellerini ekstraktörler hökmünde duýdury bilgileri geçirip, bu representasyony däpli maşyny öwrenmek modelleri üçin ullanýarys. ýaly vektör regressiýasy (SVR) we logistik regressiýasy çözmek üçin düzenli maşyny öwrenmek üçin ullanýarys. Biziň sistemamyz bärde wagtymyzyň ähli soraglarymyz üçin Top3-iň arasynda guruldy.', 'am': 'This paper describes our system that has been submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) to solve five subtasks.  በጽሑፎች ውስጥ ያሉትን የድምፅ እና የቃላት ደረጃዎች እና የኢሜጂ እና ሐሽታግሎችን በተለይ የኮርፖራ አካባቢ እና እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሐሳብን እውቀት የናውሬል መረብ ሞዴላዎችን በመጠቀም እና እነዚህንም የባሕላዊ መሳሪያ ማስተማር ሞዴላዎችን ለመጠቀም እና የዋንትሮር ክፍተት (SVR) እና የግንኙነቱን ስርዓት ለመፍታት እና የግንኙነት ትክክለኛ ትክክለኛዎችን ለመፍታት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ስብስነታችን ለሁሉም ስርዓቶች በላይ3 ውስጥ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে আমাদের সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করেছে যা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের প্রতি জমা দেয়া হয়েছে: টুইটারে পাঁচটি সাবকাজ সমাধানের জন আমরা বিশাল কোর্পোরার মাধ্যমে অনুভূতি এবং হ্যাশট্যাগের মাধ্যমে অনুভূতির প্রতিনিধিত্বের বাক্য এবং শব্দের স্তরের প্রতিনিধি আমরা নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেলগুলো ব্যবহার করে ঐতিহ্যবাহী মেশিন শিক্ষার মডেলগুলোর প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব ব্যবহার করি, যেমন ভেক্টর প্রতিষ্ঠান (এসভিআর) সমর্থন করে এবং প্রতিযোগ আমাদের সিস্টেম টপ ৩ এর মধ্যে রাখা হয়েছে যাতে আমরা অংশগ্রহণ করেছি সকল সাবটাকাজের জন্য।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem koji je podignut zadatku 1 za pola Evala-2018: utjecaj na Tweets (AIT) za rješavanje pet podataka. Fokusiramo se na modeliranje rečenice i razine riječi predstavljanja emocija unutar teksta kroz veliku daleko označenu korporu sa emojima i hashtagama. Prebacujemo emocionalno znanje iskorištavajući neuralne mreže modele kao ekstraktore i koristimo te predstave za tradicionalne modele učenja strojeva poput podrške vektorregresije (SVR) i logističke regresije kako bi riješili zadatke natjecanja. Naš sistem je postavljen među Top3 za sve poduzeće koje smo učestvovali.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim sistemimizi SemEval-2018 Task 1 təbliğ edir: Beş çətinlikləri çəkmək üçün Tweets (AIT) ilə müxtəlif etmiş. Biz hər cümlənin və sözlərin səviyyəsinin mətnlərin içindəki duyguların modellərini emoji və hashtaqlarla çox uzaq etiketli korpora vasitəsilə göstəririk. Biz duygusal bilgiləri nöral ağ modellərini özellik ekstraktörlər kimi istifadə edərək və bu göstəriciləri müqayisədə işləri çəkmək üçün vector regresi (SVR) və loģistiki regresi kimi alırıq. Sistemimiz Top3 arasında bizim katıldığımız bütün subaskerlər üçün yerləşdirildi.', 'sq': 'This paper describes our system that has been submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) to solve five subtasks.  We focus on modeling both sentence and word level representations of emotion inside texts through large distantly labeled corpora with emojis and hashtags.  Ne transferojmë njohuritë emocionale duke shfrytëzuar modelet e rrjetit nervor si nxjerrës të funksioneve dhe përdorim këto përfaqësime për modelet tradicionale të mësimit të makinave të tilla si regresioni i vektorëve (SVR) dhe regresioni logjistik për të zgjidhur detyrat e konkurrencës. Sistemi ynë është vendosur midis Top3 për të gjitha nënkërkesat që kemi marrë pjesë.', 'et': 'Selles artiklis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi, mis on esitatud SemEval-2018 ülesandele 1: mõju tweetides (AIT), et lahendada viis alamülesannet. Me keskendume nii lause- kui ka sõnatasemel emotsioonide kujundamisele tekstides läbi suurte kaugelt märgistatud korpuste emojide ja hashtagedega. Me edastame emotsionaalseid teadmisi, kasutades ära närvivõrgu mudeleid funktsioonide ekstraktoritena ning kasutame neid representatsioone traditsiooniliste masinõppe mudelite puhul, nagu tugivektori regressioon (SVR) ja logistiline regressioon konkurentsiülesannete lahendamiseks. Meie süsteem on paigutatud Top3 hulka kõikide allülesannete puhul, milles osalesime.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli kuvaa järjestelmäämme, joka on lähetetty SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) -ohjelmaan viiden alitehtävän ratkaisemiseksi. Keskitymme sekä lause- että sanatason tunteiden esitysten mallintamiseen tekstien sisällä suurten etämerkittyjen korpusten avulla emojien ja hashtagien avulla. Siirrämme emotionaalista tietoa hyödyntämällä neuroverkkomalleja ominaisuuksien purkajina ja käytämme näitä representaatioita perinteisissä koneoppimismalleissa, kuten tukivektoriregressiossa (SVR) ja logistisessa regressiossa kilpailutehtävien ratkaisemiseen. Järjestelmämme on sijoitettu Top3:n joukkoon kaikissa osatehtävissä, joihin osallistuimme.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém, který byl předložen do SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) pro řešení pěti podúkolů. Zaměřujeme se na modelování emocí na úrovni vět i slov v textech prostřednictvím velkých vzdáleně označených korpusů s emoji a hashtagy. Emoční znalosti přenášíme využitím modelů neuronových sítí jako extraktorů funkcí a tyto reprezentace využíváme pro tradiční modely strojového učení, jako je podpora vektorové regrese (SVR) a logistická regrese k řešení konkurenčních úkolů. Náš systém je umístěn mezi Top3 pro všechny dílčí úkoly, které jsme se zúčastnili.', 'ca': "This paper describes our system that has been submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) to solve five subtasks.  Ens centrem en modelar representacions de frases i nivell de paraules d'emocions dins els textos a través de grans corpores etiquetats a distància amb emoji i hashtags. Transferem el coneixement emocional explotant els models de xarxa neural com a extractors de característiques i utilitzem aquestes representacions per a models tradicionals d'aprenentatge màquinari com la regressió dels vectors (SVR) i la regressió logística per resoldre les tasques de competició. Our system is placed among the Top3 for all subtasks we participated.", 'hy': 'This paper describes our system that has been submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets (AIT) to solve five subtasks.  We focus on modeling both sentence and word level representations of emotion inside texts through large distantly labeled corpora with emojis and hashtags.  Մենք փոխանցում ենք էմոցիոնալ գիտելիքները, օգտագործելով նյարդային ցանցի մոդելները որպես առանձնահատկությունների վերացուցիչներ և օգտագործելով այս ներկայացուցիչները ավանդական մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մոդելների համար, ինչպիսիք են վիկտորների ռեգրեսիան (VՌ)  Մեր համակարգը տեղադրված է Top3-ի մեջ մեր մասնակցության բոլոր ենթախնդիրների համար:', 'jv': 'Perintah iki diperawan sistem sing dumateng kang semebal-2008 task 1: AfEffectt in Two (AIT) kanggo ngilangno limo dolanan. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing dadi nggambar obah-obahan lan gambar kuwi kesempatan langgar-obahan seneng gedung winih, kuwi mênêrung kuwi etiket awak dhéwé berarti cara-itik lan etiket awak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé nggawe langgar kelas kuwi alam soko nggawe modèl alam nyebutur karo ingkang extraector karo nggambar kuwi tindakan sistem sing nyimpen karo perusahaan maneh karo perusahaan lagi nggawe vector Regresyon (SVR) lan logistik Regresyon nggawe gerakan tanggal nggawe gerakan sampek. Sistem awak dhéwé iso ngetokaké ning top 3 kanggo sabané supaya awak dhéwé nambah.', 'ha': "Bu takardan na bayyana na'urarmu wanda aka saka zuwa SemEV-2018 Kafin 1: Affect in Twitter (AIT) to solve shan subaikin. Tuna kiyãye masu motsari ga maganar da maganar daraja masu cikin matsayin da ke cikin littãfin da ke samun makampuni da aka rubũta shi da hashtags mai girma. Munã sakar da ma'anar hisia da za'a yi amfani da misalin mitandaki na neurar kamar masu amfani da waɗannan masu motsi wa masu amfani da shiryoyin ayuka na ƙidãya, kamar misãlai na ƙara haramtar masu kashi (SvR) da kuma rajistarwa na logistic dõmin ya raba aikin gaura. An sakar da kanmu a cikin dukkan aikin da muka haɗa shi.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו שנשלחה לסימוול-2018 משימה 1: השפעה בטוויטים (AIT) כדי לפתור חמישה תת-שאלות. אנו מתמקדים בדוגמא בין משפטים ורמה מילים מייצגים של רגשות בתוך טקסטים דרך גופרה גדולה במרחק מסומנת אנו מעבירים את הידע הרגשי על ידי ניצלון דוגמנים רשת עצבית כחולץ תכונות ושימוש בתוצאות אלה לדוגמנים מסורתיים של לימוד מכונות כמו מחזור ווקטור (SVR) ותחזור לוגיסטי כדי לפתור את משימות התחרות. המערכת שלנו מונחת בין העליון 3 לכל השאלות שהשתתפנו.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem, ki je bil predložen SemEval-2018 naloga 1: Vpliv v tweets (AIT) za reševanje petih podopravil. Osredotočamo se na modeliranje stavkovnih in besednih predstavitev čustev znotraj besedil skozi velike daljno označene korpuse z emojiji in hashtagi. Čustveno znanje prenašamo z izkoriščanjem modelov nevronskih omrežij kot ekstraktorjev funkcij in uporabljamo te reprezentacije za tradicionalne modele strojnega učenja, kot sta podporna vektorska regresija (SVR) in logistična regresija za reševanje konkurenčnih nalog. Naš sistem je uvrščen med Top3 za vse podnaloge, ki smo jih sodelovali.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དོན་ལ་SemEval-2018 ལས་ཀ་གསལ་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་དོན་ལྟར་༡： We focus on modeling both sentence and word level representations of emotion inside texts through large distantly labeled corpora with emojis and hashtags. We transfer the emotional knowledge by exploiting neural network models as feature extractors and use these representations for traditional machine learning models such as support vector regression (SVR) and logistic regression to solve the competition tasks. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མཁན་གྱི་དོན་ཚན་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'ar': 'YNU-HPCC في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: BiLSTM مع تحليل المشاعر القائمة على الانتباه للتأثير في التغريدات', 'pt': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: BiLSTM com análise de sentimento baseada em atenção para afeto em tweets', 'es': 'YNU-HPCC en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: BILSTM con análisis de sentimiento basado en la atención para el efecto en los tuits', 'fr': "YNU-HPCC au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: BilsTM avec analyse des sentiments basée sur l'attention pour l'affect dans les Tweets", 'ja': 'YNU - HPCC at SemEval -2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention Based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'zh': 'YNU-HPCC在SemEval-2018务1:BiLSTM与注意之情析而推之', 'hi': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर: Tweets में प्रभाव के लिए ध्यान आधारित भावना विश्लेषण के साथ BiLSTM', 'ru': 'YNU-HPCC на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: BiLSTM с анализом настроений на основе внимания для воздействия в твитах', 'ga': 'YNU-HPCC ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: BiLSTM le Anailís Mothúchán Bunaithe ar Aird le haghaidh Tionchar i dTuathanna', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: με ανάλυση συναισθημάτων με βάση την προσοχή για την επίδραση στα τουίτ', 'hu': 'YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: BiLSTM figyelem alapú érzékeléssel a tweetekben', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': "YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM con analisi dei sentimenti basata sull'attenzione per l'impatto nei tweet", 'kk': 'YNU', 'mk': 'YNU-HPCC на SemEval-2018 задача 1: BiLSTM со внимание базирана анализа на чувства за влијание на твитови', 'lt': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'ms': 'YNU-HPCC pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: BiLSTM dengan Analisi Sentiment berdasarkan Perhatian untuk Kesan dalam Tweets', 'mt': 'YNU-HPCC f’SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention-based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'mn': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Effects in Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്കില്\u200d യുന്\u200dയൂ- ഹിപിസിസി 1: ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നതിനായി ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റിമെന്\u200dറ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സെന്റ', 'no': 'YNU-HPCC at semiEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Effect in Tweets', 'pl': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: BiLSTM z analizą sentymentów opartą na uwadze dla efektów w tweetach', 'ro': 'YNU-HPCC la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: BiLSTM cu analiza sentimentelor bazată pe atenție pentru afecte în tweets', 'sr': 'YNU-HPCC na semiEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM sa pažnjom baziranom Sentimentnom analizom posledica u Tweets-u', 'si': 'YNA-HPCC at semeval-2018 Job 1: BiLSTM with Attension based Sentiment විශ්ලේෂණය Tweets in Affects', 'sv': 'YNU-HPCC på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: BiLSTM med uppmärksamhetsbaserad känsloanalys för påverkan i tweets', 'so': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analyse for Affect in Tweets', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் YNU- HPCC 1: விளைவுக்கான வாக்கியங்களுக்கு சார்ந்த உணர்வு ஆய்வு', 'ur': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with attention based Sentiment Analysis for Effects in Tweets', 'uz': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'vi': 'Hồ sơ tình cảm cho tình cảm trên trang Tweet', 'bg': 'Задача 1: БиЛСТМ с анализ на сентимента, базиран на вниманието, за ефекта в туитове', 'nl': 'YNU-HPCC bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: BiLSTM met Aandacht gebaseerde Sentiment Analyse voor Affect in Tweets', 'da': 'YNU-HPCC på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: BiLSTM med opmærksomhedsbaseret følelsesanalyse for påvirkning i tweets', 'de': 'YNU-HPCC bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: BiLSTM mit aufmerksamkeitsbasierter Sentimentanalyse für Affekt in Tweets', 'id': 'YNU-HPCC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: BiLSTM dengan Analisi Sentiment Berdasarkan Perhatian untuk Affect di Tweets', 'ko': 'YNU-HPCC가SemEval-2018에서의 임무1: 주의력의 정서 분석을 바탕으로 트위터의 감정에 대해 BilSTM', 'fa': 'YNU', 'sw': 'YNU-HPCC katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: BiLSTM na Uchambuzi wa Sentiment kwa Affect kwenye twita', 'af': 'YNU-HPCC by SemEval-2018 Taak 1: BiLSTM met aandag gebaseerde Sentiment Analyseer vir Afteken in Tweets', 'sq': 'YNU-HPCC në SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'hy': 'YNH-ՀՊՔ-ը, 2018-ի «ՍեմԷվալ» առաջին հանձնարարում. ԲիLSԹՄ-ը ուշադրության վրա հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը Թվիթերում', 'am': 'የYNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 ስራ 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'hr': 'YNU-HPCC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: BiLSTM s pažnjom baziranom Sentimentnom analizom utjecaja na tweets', 'az': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Effects in Tweets', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ইয়াএনইউ-এইচপিসিসি: টুইটে প্রভাবিত সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য মনোযোগ দিয়ে বিএলস্টিম', 'bs': 'YNU-HPCC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: BiLSTM sa pažnjom baziranom Sentimentnom analizom posljedica u Tweets-u', 'cs': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: BiLSTM s analýzou sentimentů založenými na pozornosti pro efekt ve tweetech', 'tr': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'ca': 'YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'et': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2018 ülesandel 1: BiLSTM koos tähelepanupõhise tunnete analüüsiga mõju kohta tweetides', 'fi': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 1: BiLSTM ja huomiopohjainen tunteiden analysointi tweeteissä', 'jv': 'YNU', 'ha': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets', 'sk': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 naloga 1: BiLSTM s pozornostjo temelječo analizo čustva za vpliv v tweets', 'he': 'YNU-HPCC ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: BiLSTM עם ניתוח תחושה מבוסס על תשומת לב', 'bo': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: BiLSTM with Attention based Sentiment Analysis for Affect in Tweets'}
{'en': 'We implemented the sentiment system in all five subtasks for English and Spanish. All subtasks involve emotion or sentiment intensity prediction (regression and ordinal classification) and emotions determining (multi-labels classification). The useful BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) model with attention mechanism was mainly applied for our system. We use BiLSTM in order to get word information extracted from both directions. The attention mechanism was used to find the contribution of each word for improving the scores. Furthermore, based on BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM with attention mechanism) a few deep-learning algorithms were employed for different subtasks. For regression and ordinal classification tasks we used domain adaptation and ensemble learning methods to leverage base model. While a single base model was used for multi-labels task.', 'ar': 'طبقنا نظام المشاعر في جميع المهام الفرعية الخمس للغة الإنجليزية والإسبانية. تتضمن جميع المهام الفرعية توقع شدة العاطفة أو المشاعر (تصنيف الانحدار والترتيبي) وتحديد العواطف (تصنيف متعدد التسميات). تم تطبيق نموذج BiLSTM (الذاكرة ثنائية الاتجاه طويلة المدى) المفيدة مع آلية الانتباه بشكل أساسي لنظامنا. نحن نستخدم BiLSTM من أجل الحصول على معلومات الكلمات المستخرجة من كلا الاتجاهين. تم استخدام آلية الانتباه للعثور على مساهمة كل كلمة لتحسين النتائج. علاوة على ذلك ، بناءً على BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM مع آلية الانتباه) ، تم استخدام عدد قليل من خوارزميات التعلم العميق لمهام فرعية مختلفة. بالنسبة لمهام الانحدار والتصنيف الترتيبي ، استخدمنا تكييف المجال وأساليب تعلم المجموعة للاستفادة من النموذج الأساسي. بينما تم استخدام نموذج أساسي واحد لمهمة متعددة التسميات.', 'es': 'Implementamos el sistema de sentimiento en las cinco subtareas para inglés y español. Todas las subtareas implican la predicción de la intensidad de emociones o sentimientos (regresión y clasificación ordinal) y la determinación de las emociones (clasificación de múltiples etiquetas). El útil modelo BILSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) con mecanismo de atención se aplicó principalmente a nuestro sistema. Usamos BilsTM para obtener información de palabras extraída de ambas direcciones. El mecanismo de atención se utilizó para encontrar la contribución de cada palabra para mejorar las puntuaciones. Además, basados en BilstMatt (BilsTM con mecanismo de atención), se emplearon algunos algoritmos de aprendizaje profundo para diferentes subtareas. Para las tareas de regresión y clasificación ordinal, utilizamos métodos de adaptación de dominio y aprendizaje conjunto para aprovechar el modelo base. Mientras que se utilizó un modelo base único para la tarea de etiquetas múltiples.', 'pt': 'Implementamos o sistema de sentimento em todas as cinco subtarefas para inglês e espanhol. Todas as subtarefas envolvem previsão de emoção ou intensidade de sentimento (regressão e classificação ordinal) e determinação de emoções (classificação multi-rótulos). O útil modelo BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) com mecanismo de atenção foi aplicado principalmente para o nosso sistema. Usamos BiLSTM para obter informações de palavras extraídas de ambas as direções. O mecanismo de atenção foi utilizado para encontrar a contribuição de cada palavra para a melhoria dos escores. Além disso, com base no BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM com mecanismo de atenção), alguns algoritmos de aprendizado profundo foram empregados para diferentes subtarefas. Para tarefas de regressão e classificação ordinal, usamos métodos de adaptação de domínio e aprendizado de conjunto para alavancar o modelo base. Enquanto um único modelo base foi usado para a tarefa multi-rótulos.', 'fr': "Nous avons intégré le système de sentiment dans les cinq sous-tâches pour l'anglais et l'espagnol. Toutes les sous-tâches impliquent la prédiction de l'intensité des émotions ou des sentiments (régression et classification ordinale) et la détermination des émotions (classification multi-étiquettes). Le modèle BilsTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) utile avec mécanisme d'attention a été principalement appliqué à notre système. Nous utilisons BilsTM afin d'obtenir des informations textuelles extraites des deux directions. Le mécanisme d'attention a été utilisé pour trouver la contribution de chaque mot pour améliorer les scores. En outre, sur la base de BilstMatt (BilsTM avec mécanisme d'attention), quelques algorithmes d'apprentissage en profondeur ont été utilisés pour différentes sous-tâches. Pour les tâches de régression et de classification ordinale, nous avons utilisé des méthodes d'adaptation de domaine et d'apprentissage d'ensemble pour exploiter le modèle de base Alors qu'un modèle de base unique a été utilisé pour la tâche multi-étiquettes.", 'ja': '英語とスペイン語の5つのサブタスクすべてにセンチメントシステムを実装しました。すべてのサブタスクには、感情または感情の強さの予測（回帰と順序分類）と感情の決定（マルチラベル分類）が含まれます。注意メカニズムを備えた有用なBiLSTM (Bidirectional Long - Short Term Memory)モデルは、主に当社のシステムに適用されました。双方向から抽出した単語情報を取得するためにBiLSTMを使用しています。注意メカニズムを使用して、スコアを改善するための各単語の貢献を見つけました。さらに、BiLSTMATT （注意メカニズムを備えたBiLSTM ）に基づいて、いくつかの深層学習アルゴリズムを異なるサブタスクに採用した。回帰と順序分類タスクでは、ベースモデルを活用するためにドメイン適応とアンサンブル学習方法を使用しました。一方、マルチラベルタスクには単一のベースモデルが使用された。', 'zh': '英语、西班牙语五子者,情之所系也。 凡子事涉情度(归序数分类)与情定(多标类)。 有用BiLSTM(双向长短期记)形用于我。 吾以 BiLSTM 取两方单词信。 注意机制,以求单词之分数。 此外,BiLSTMATT(有注意机制之BiLSTM),各用子职,深习算法。 归序数分职,用域自应成学。 而单本施于多标签。', 'hi': 'हमने अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश के लिए सभी पांच उप-कार्यों में भावना प्रणाली को लागू किया। सभी subtasks भावना या भावना तीव्रता भविष्यवाणी (प्रतिगमन और क्रमसूचक वर्गीकरण) और भावनाएं निर्धारित (बहु लेबल वर्गीकरण) शामिल हैं। ध्यान तंत्र के साथ उपयोगी BiLSTM (द्विदिश दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक स्मृति) मॉडल मुख्य रूप से हमारे सिस्टम के लिए लागू किया गया था। हम दोनों दिशाओं से निकाली गई शब्द जानकारी प्राप्त करने के लिए BiLSTM का उपयोग करते हैं। ध्यान तंत्र का उपयोग स्कोर में सुधार के लिए प्रत्येक शब्द के योगदान को खोजने के लिए किया गया था। इसके अलावा, BiLSTMATT (ध्यान तंत्र के साथ BiLSTM) के आधार पर कुछ गहरे सीखने के एल्गोरिदम को विभिन्न उप-कार्यों के लिए नियोजित किया गया था। प्रतिगमन और क्रमसूचक वर्गीकरण कार्यों के लिए हमने आधार मॉडल का लाभ उठाने के लिए डोमेन अनुकूलन और पहनावा सीखने के तरीकों का उपयोग किया। जबकि मल्टी-लेबल कार्य के लिए एक एकल आधार मॉडल का उपयोग किया गया था।', 'ru': 'Мы реализовали систему настроений во всех пяти подзадачах для английского и испанского языков. Все подзадачи включают в себя прогнозирование интенсивности эмоций или настроений (регрессия и порядковая классификация) и определение эмоций (многоуровневая классификация). Полезная модель BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) с механизмом внимания в основном применялась для нашей системы. Мы используем BiLSTM для того чтобы получить информацию слова извлеченную от обоих направлений. Механизм внимания был использован, чтобы найти вклад каждого слова для улучшения баллов. Кроме того, на основе BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM с механизмом внимания) было использовано несколько алгоритмов глубокого обучения для различных подзадач. Для задач регрессии и порядковой классификации мы использовали адаптацию домена и методы ансамблевого обучения для использования базовой модели. В то время как для задачи с несколькими метками использовалась одна базовая модель.', 'ga': 'Chuireamar an córas meon i bhfeidhm i ngach ceann de na cúig fhothasc don Bhéarla agus don Spáinnis. Is éard atá i gceist le gach fothasc ná mothúcháin nó déine na meon a thuar (aischéimniú agus ord rangú) agus cinneadh mothúcháin (aicmiú illipéid). Cuireadh an tsamhail úsáideach BiLSTM (Cuimhne Fadtéarmach Déthreo) le meicníocht aird i bhfeidhm go príomha dár gcóras. Bainimid úsáid as BiLSTM chun eolas focal a bhaintear as an dá threo a fháil. Baineadh úsáid as an meicníocht aird chun rannchuidiú gach focal a fháil chun na scóir a fheabhsú. Ina theannta sin, bunaithe ar BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM le meicníocht aird) úsáideadh cúpla algartam domhainfhoghlama le haghaidh fothascanna éagsúla. Le haghaidh aischéimniúcháin agus gnáth-tascanna aicmithe, d’úsáideamar oiriúnú fearainn agus modhanna foghlama ensemble chun bunsamhail a ghiaráil. Cé gur úsáideadh bunsamhail aonair le haghaidh tasc illipéad.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmi rendszert mind az öt részfeladatban bevezettük angol és spanyol nyelven. Minden részfeladat magában foglalja az érzelmi vagy érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzését (regresszió és rendeleti osztályozás), valamint az érzelmek meghatározását (multi-labels osztályozás). A hasznos BiLSTM (kétirányú hosszú-rövid távú memória) modellt figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmussal alkalmaztuk elsősorban rendszerünkre. A BiLSTM-et használjuk, hogy mindkét irányból kivonhassuk a szóinformációkat. A figyelem mechanizmusával megtaláltuk az egyes szavak hozzájárulását a pontszámok javításához. Továbbá a BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM figyelemmechanizmussal) alapján néhány mélytanulási algoritmust alkalmaztunk különböző altfeladatokhoz. Regressziós és ordinális osztályozási feladatokhoz domain adaptációs és együttes tanulási módszereket használtunk az alapmodell kihasználására. Míg egyetlen alapmodellt használtak a multi-labels feladatokhoz.', 'el': 'Εφαρμόσαμε το σύστημα συναισθημάτων και στις πέντε δευτερεύουσες εργασίες για τα αγγλικά και τα ισπανικά. Όλες οι δευτερεύουσες εργασίες περιλαμβάνουν πρόβλεψη έντασης συναισθημάτων ή συναισθημάτων (παλινδρόμηση και κανονική ταξινόμηση) και προσδιορισμό συναισθημάτων (ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών ετικετών). Το χρήσιμο μοντέλο με μηχανισμό προσοχής εφαρμόστηκε κυρίως για το σύστημά μας. Χρησιμοποιούμε για να πάρουμε πληροφορίες λέξεων που εξάγονται και από τις δύο κατευθύνσεις. Ο μηχανισμός προσοχής χρησιμοποιήθηκε για να βρεθεί η συμβολή κάθε λέξης για τη βελτίωση των βαθμολογιών. Επιπλέον, με βάση το BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM με μηχανισμό προσοχής) χρησιμοποιήθηκαν μερικοί αλγόριθμοι βαθιάς μάθησης για διαφορετικές δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Για τις εργασίες παλινδρόμησης και κανονικής ταξινόμησης χρησιμοποιήσαμε μεθόδους προσαρμογής τομέων και εκμάθησης συνόλων για να αξιοποιήσουμε το μοντέλο βάσης. Ενώ ένα μοντέλο βάσης χρησιμοποιήθηκε για εργασία πολλαπλών ετικετών.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ინგლისური და სპანელი სისტემის სენტიმენტის სისტემის გამოყენება. ყველა საფეხმარები ემოცია ან სენტიმენტის ინტენსტივის წარმოდგენება (რეგრესია და ორგანალური კლასიფიკაცია) და ემოციები განსაზღვრებს (მრავალური კლასიფიკაცია). გამოსახულებელი BiLSTM (ორედირექციონალური სისტემის მეხსიერება) მოდელი, რომელიც ჩვენი სისტემისთვის აყენებულია. ჩვენ BiLSTM-ს გამოყენებთ ორივე მხარედან სიტყვების ინფორმაციის გამოყენება. ყველა სიტყვების დამატებისთვის შესაძლებლობად დააყენება მონიშვნელოვანი მექანსი. დამატებით, BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM მექანსისთვის შესახებ) განსხვავებული სტატისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვის რამდენიმე ალგორიტიმები რეგრესი და ორგანალური კლასიფიკაციის დავალებისთვის ჩვენ მოვიყენეთ დიომინის ადაპექტირება და სწავლების მეტოვებისთვის ბაზის მოდელის გამოყენება. მაგრამ ერთი ბაზის მოდელი მრავალური საქაღალდეებისთვის გამოყენებული იყო.', 'it': "Abbiamo implementato il sentiment system in tutte e cinque le sottoattività di inglese e spagnolo. Tutte le sottoattività riguardano la previsione dell'intensità emotiva o sentimentale (regressione e classificazione ordinale) e la determinazione delle emozioni (classificazione multi-etichetta). L'utile modello BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) con meccanismo di attenzione è stato applicato principalmente per il nostro sistema. Usiamo BiLSTM per ottenere informazioni sulle parole estratte da entrambe le direzioni. Il meccanismo di attenzione è stato utilizzato per trovare il contributo di ogni parola per migliorare i punteggi. Inoltre, sulla base di BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM con meccanismo di attenzione) sono stati impiegati alcuni algoritmi di deep learning per diverse sottoattività. Per le attività di regressione e classificazione ordinale abbiamo utilizzato metodi di adattamento del dominio e di apprendimento ensemble per sfruttare il modello base. Mentre un singolo modello di base è stato utilizzato per attività multi-etichette.", 'mk': 'Го спроведовме системот на чувства во сите пет потпрашања за англиски и шпански. Сите потпрашања вклучуваат предвидување на емоциите или чувствителната интензитет (регресија и ординална класификација) и емоции кои одредуваат (класификација на мултиетики). The useful BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) model with attention mechanism was mainly applied for our system.  Ние користиме BiLSTM за да добиеме информации за зборот извадени од двете насоки. Механизмот на внимание беше искористен за да се најде придонесот на секој збор за подобрување на резултатите. Покрај тоа, врз основа на БиLSTMATT (BiLSTM со механизам на внимание) беа употребени неколку алгоритми за длабоко учење за различни подзадачи. За регресија и ординални класификациски задачи користевме адаптација на доменот и ансемблиравме методи на учење за да го искористиме базичкиот модел. While a single base model was used for multi-labels task.', 'lt': 'Įgyvendinome jausmų sistemą visose penkiose anglų ir ispanų paklausose. Visi požymiai apima emocijų ar jausmų intensyvumo prognozę (regresiją ir ordinarinę klasifikaciją) ir emocijas, lemiančias (daugiametę klasifikaciją). Naudingas BiLSTM (dvikryptinis ilgalaikis atmintis) modelis su dėmesio mechanizmu daugiausia buvo taikomas mūsų sistemai. Naudojame BiLSTM, kad gautume žodžio informaciją iš abiejų krypčių. Siekiant rasti kiekvieno žodžio indėlį gerinant rezultatus, buvo naudojamas dėmesio mechanizmas. Be to, remiantis BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM su dėmesio mechanizmu) buvo naudojami keli gilaus mokymosi algoritmai skirtingoms paklausoms. For regression and ordinal classification tasks we used domain adaptation and ensemble learning methods to leverage base model.  Daugiaženkliams uždaviniams buvo naudojamas vienas bazinis modelis.', 'ms': 'Kami melaksanakan sistem perasaan dalam lima subtasks bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol. Semua subtasks melibatkan ramalan emosi atau intensiti perasaan (regresi dan klasifikasi ordinal) dan emosi yang menentukan (klasifikasi multi-label). Model BiLSTM berguna (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) dengan mekanisme perhatian terutamanya dilaksanakan untuk sistem kita. Kami menggunakan BiLSTM untuk mendapatkan maklumat perkataan yang dikeluarkan dari kedua-dua arah. Mekanisme perhatian digunakan untuk mencari kontribusi setiap perkataan untuk memperbaiki skor. Lagipun, berdasarkan BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM dengan mekanisme perhatian) beberapa algoritma pembelajaran dalam digunakan untuk subtasks yang berbeza. Untuk tugas regresi dan klasifikasi ordinal kami menggunakan penyesuaian domain dan ensemble kaedah belajar untuk menggunakan model asas. Sementara model asas tunggal digunakan untuk tugas multi-label.', 'kk': 'Біз ағылшын және испан тілінің бес суреттерінде сезімдер жүйесін орындадық. Барлық ішкі сұрақтар емоциялық немесе сезімдік қанықтығын (регрессия және орындалық классификация) және эмоциялар (көп жарлықтар классификациясы) анықтайды. Қарапайым BiLSTM (екі бағытты ұзын қысқа уақыт жады) үлгісі жүйемізге негізінде қолданылады. Біз сөз мәліметін екі бағыттан шығару үшін BiLSTM қолданамыз. Бұл механизм әрбір сөздің нәтижесін жақсарту үшін қатынасын табу үшін қолданылды. Қосымша, BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM механизмі арқылы) негізінде бірнеше қалыпты оқыту алгоритмдері түрлі субсаттар үшін қолданылады. Регрессия және орындалық классификациялау тапсырмалары үшін біз доменнің адаптациясын қолдандық және негізгі үлгі үлгілеу үшін оқыту әдістерін қолданды Бір негізгі үлгі көп жарлық тапсырмалар үшін қолданылады.', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷും വേണ്ടി എല്ലാ അഞ്ച് സബ്ട്ടാസുകളിലും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരപ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചു. എല്ലാ ഉപാധികളും വികാരങ്ങളോ വികാരങ്ങളോ പ്രവചനങ്ങളുടെ ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രവചനത്തിനും പിന്തുടര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്നു. മറ്റു ചിഹ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ക ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റം (Bidirectional Long- Short Term Memory) മോഡല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിനായി പ്രയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു. രണ്ടു വഴിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്കുകള്\u200d എടുക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. സ്കോര്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനുള്ള ഓരോ വാക്കിന്റെയും പങ്ക് കണ്ടെത്താനായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മെന്\u200dജിന Furthermore, based on BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM with attention mechanism) a few deep-learning algorithms were employed for different subtasks.  വീണ്ടും സാധാരണ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരുന്നു. ബേസ് മോഡല പല-ലേബലുകളുടെ ജോലിക്ക് ഒരു ബേസ് മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d.', 'mt': 'Aħna implimentajna s-sistema tas-sentimenti fil-ħames sottotalbiet kollha għall-Ingliż u l-Ispanjol. Is-sottomistoqsijiet kollha jinvolvu tbassir tal-intensità tal-emozzjonijiet jew tas-sentimenti (rigressjoni u klassifikazzjoni ordinali) u emozzjonijiet li jiddeterminaw (klassifikazzjoni b’ħafna tikketti). Il-mudell utli BiLSTM (Memorja Bidirezzjonali fuq terminu twil u qasir) b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni ġie applikat prinċipalment għas-sistema tagħna. Aħna nużaw BiLSTM sabiex in ġibdu informazzjoni bil-kliem miż-żewġ direzzjonijiet. Il-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni ntuża biex jinstab il-kontribut ta’ kull kelma għat-titjib tal-punteġġi. Barra minn hekk, ibbażat fuq BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni) ġew użati ftit algoritmi ta’ tagħlim fil-fond għal sottomistoqsijiet differenti. Għall-kompiti ta’ rigressjoni u klassifikazzjoni ordinali użajna l-adattament tad-dominju u nġabru flimkien metodi ta’ tagħlim biex inħeġġu l-mudell bażi. Filwaqt li ntuża mudell bażi wieħed għall-kompitu b’ħafna tikketti.', 'mn': 'Бид англи болон Испанийг мэдрэмжүүдийн системийг бүх таван сургуульд хийсэн. Бүх дотроо сурагчид сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчтэй таамаглал (сэтгэл хөдлөл, загвар дүрслэл) болон сэтгэл хөдлөл тодорхойлдог (олон жагсаалт дүрслэл). БиЛСТМ (хоёр багын богино хугацааны санамж) загвар нь анхаарлын механизмтай ихэвчлэн бидний системд хэрэглэгдсэн. Бид BiLSTM-г хоёр талаас мэдээллийг авахын тулд ашиглаж байна. Анхаарлын механизм нь тоонуудыг сайжруулахын тулд үг бүрийн нөлөөлөлтийг олохын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн. Дараа нь BiLSTMATT (анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмтэй BiLSTM) дээр үндсэн хэд хэдэн гүн суралцах алгоритм нь өөр суурь суурь шаардлагатай байдаг. Регрессийн, загварын хуваалтын даалгавруудын тулд бид холбооны адаптацийг ашиглаж суралцах аргыг суурь загварыг ашиглаж байлаа. Нэг суурь загвар олон загварын ажил дээр хэрэглэгдсэн.', 'pl': 'Wdrożyliśmy system sentymentów we wszystkich pięciu podzadaniach dla angielskiego i hiszpańskiego. Wszystkie podzadania obejmują przewidywanie intensywności emocji lub sentymentów (regresja i klasyfikacja ordynalna) oraz określanie emocji (klasyfikacja wieloznakowa). Przydatny model BiLSTM (dwukierunkowa pamięć długoterminowa) z mechanizmem uwagi został zastosowany głównie do naszego systemu. Używamy BiLSTM w celu uzyskania informacji słownych pochodzących z obu kierunków. Zastosowano mechanizm uwagi, aby znaleźć wkład każdego słowa w poprawę wyników. Ponadto w oparciu o BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM z mechanizmem uwagi) zastosowano kilka algorytmów głębokiego uczenia się dla różnych podzadań. Do zadań regresji i klasyfikacji ordynalnej wykorzystaliśmy metody adaptacji domen oraz zespołowego uczenia się w celu wykorzystania modelu bazowego. Podczas gdy pojedynczy model bazowy był używany do zadania wielu etykiet.', 'no': 'Vi implementerte følelsesystemet i alle fem underspørsmål for engelsk og spansk. Alle underspørsmåla inneheld følelsesintensitet (regresjon og ordinalklassifikasjon) og følelser som bestemmer (klassifikasjon av fleire merkelappar). Det nyttige BiLSTM-modellen (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) med oppmerksmekanismen var hovudsakelig brukt for systemet vårt. Vi brukar BiLSTM for å få ordinformasjon ut frå begge retningar. Merknadsmekanismenyen vart brukt for å finna bidraga til kvar ord for å forbetra poengringane. I tillegg, basert på BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM med oppmerksmekanisme) var noen få dyblæringsalgoritme arbeida for ulike underspørsmål. For regresjon og ordinale klassifikasjonar brukte vi domeneadaptasjon og ensembler læringsmetodar for å levera basemodell. Mens ein enkel grunnmodell vart brukt for fleire merkelappar.', 'ro': 'Am implementat sistemul sentimental în toate cele cinci subactivități pentru engleză și spaniolă. Toate subactivitățile implică predicția intensității emoțiilor sau sentimentelor (regresie și clasificare ordinară) și determinarea emoțiilor (clasificare multi-etichete). Modelul util BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) cu mecanism de atentie a fost aplicat in principal pentru sistemul nostru. Folosim BiLSTM pentru a obține informații despre cuvinte extrase din ambele direcții. Mecanismul de atenție a fost folosit pentru a găsi contribuția fiecărui cuvânt pentru îmbunătățirea scorurilor. În plus, pe baza BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM cu mecanism de atenție) au fost utilizați câțiva algoritmi de învățare profundă pentru diferite subactivități. Pentru activitățile de regresie și clasificare ordinară am folosit metode de adaptare a domeniului și învățare ansamblu pentru a valorifica modelul de bază. În timp ce un singur model de bază a fost folosit pentru activitatea multi-etichete.', 'sr': 'Implicirali smo sistem sentimenta u svih pet podkaza za engleski i španjolski. Svi podaci uključuju predviđanje emocija ili intenziteta sentimenta (regresija i redovna klasifikacija) i emocije koje određuju (klasifikacija multietiketa). Korisni model BiLSTM (dvodirektivna dugoročna uspomena) s mehanizam pažnje je uglavnom primjenjen za naš sistem. Koristimo BiLSTM kako bi dobili informacije o reèima izvuèene iz oba smjera. Mehanizam pažnje je korišćen kako bi pronašao doprinos svake reči za poboljšanje rezultata. Osim toga, na temelju BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM sa mehanizam pažnje) poslužili su nekoliko algoritma dubokog učenja za različite podatake. Za odgovore regresije i uredne klasifikacije koristili smo adaptaciju domena i uključivali metode učenja da bi uticali na bazni model. Dok je jedan bazni model korišćen za multi-etikete zadatak.', 'si': 'අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් සඳහා හැම ප්\u200dරශ්න පහයක්ම දැනුම් පද්ධතියක් පටන් ගත්තා. සියලුම සබ්ස්ටස් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ හැඟීමක් නැත්තම් අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස (regression and ordinal classification) සහ හ හැඟීමක් නිර්ධාරණය (Multi- ප්\u200dරයෝජනය බිල්ස්ටිම් (දෙපැත්තියෙන් ලොකු කොටි වාර්තාව මතකය) මොඩල් අපේ පද්ධතිය සඳහා අවධාන පද්ධතිය ස අපි BiLSTM භාවිතා කරනවා වචන තොරතුරු දෙන්නම් පැත්තෙන් අරගෙන යන්න. අවධානය පද්ධතිය හොයාගන්න හැම වචනයක්ම ප්\u200dරමාණය හොයාගන්න භාවිත වුනා. ඉතින්, BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM අවධානය සඳහා අවධානය කරන්න) ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් කිහිපයක් වෙනස් අවධානය සඳහා ව ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශේෂණ වැඩක් සඳහා අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශේෂ ලේබල් වැඩකට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි.', 'so': 'Waxaannu ku sameeynay nidaamka dareecada shanta shabakad ee Ingiriis iyo Isbanish. Shaqooyinka dhamaantood waxay ka mid yihiin wax ku saabsan xisaabta iyo waxyaabaha la sii sheego (xisaabinta iyo fasaxa caadiga ah) iyo fikrada go’aanta (fasaxa calaamado badan). Tusaale faa’iido leh BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) oo lagu haysto focus mechanism waxaa ugu horeyn loo codsaday nidaamka. BiLSTM waxaynu isticmaalnaa si aan u helno macluumaad ku saabsan labada hagood. mekaniisada daryeelka waxaa loo isticmaalay inuu helo warqad kasta oo uu ku hagaajiyo scoraha. Furthermore, BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM with focus mechanism) waxaa lagu isticmaalay koox koorasyo waxbarasho oo mool dheer ah oo lagu qoray shaqooyin kala duduwan. For regression and ordinal classification tasks we used domain adaptation and ensemble learning methods to leverage base model.  Inta lagu isticmaalay muusiko gaar ah oo loo isticmaalay shaqo labo badan.', 'sv': 'Vi implementerade sentimentsystemet i alla fem deluppgifter för engelska och spanska. Alla underuppgifter omfattar prediktion av känslointensitet (regression och ordinell klassificering) och bestämning av känslor (multi-labels klassificering). Den användbara BiLSTM-modellen (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) med uppmärksamhetsmekanism användes främst för vårt system. Vi använder BiLSTM för att få ordinformation extraherad från båda riktningarna. Uppmärksamhetsmekanismen användes för att hitta bidraget från varje ord för att förbättra poängen. Vidare, baserat på BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM med uppmärksamhetsmekanism) användes några djupinlärningsalgoritmer för olika underuppgifter. För regressions- och ordinella klassificeringsuppgifter använde vi domänanpassning och ensembleinlärningsmetoder för att utnyttja basmodellen. Medan en enda basmodell användes för multi-labels uppgift.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் அனைத்து ஐந்து உப பணிகளிலும் உணர்வு அமைப்பை செயல்படுத்தினோம் ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் அனைத்து துணை பணிகளும் உணர்வு அல்லது உணர்வு கூட்டும் முன்னோட்டம் (கட்டுப்பாட்டு மற்றும் வழக்கமான வகைப்பு) மற்றும் உணர்வுகள் (பல- சிட் பயனுள்ள BiLSTM (இருதிசை நீண்ட- சிறிய முறை நினைவகம்) மாதிரி கவனத்துடன் முறைமையாக எங்கள் கணினிக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது. இரு திசையிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளை பெற பில்எஸ்டிஎம் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். புள்ளிகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் பங்கீட்டை கண்டுபிடிக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது. Furthermore, based on BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM with attention mechanism) a few deep-learning algorithms were employed for different subtasks.  திரும்ப மற்றும் வழக்கமான வகுப்பு பணிகளுக்கு நாம் டோமைன் ஒதுக்குதல் மற்றும் ஒற்றைப்படையான கற்றல் முறைமைகளை பயன்படு ஒரே அடிப்படை மாதிரி பல- சிட்டைகள் பணிக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது', 'ur': 'ہم نے انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی کے لئے پانچ سپٹسپ میں احساسات سیسٹم کو عمدہ کیا۔ تمام غلاموں میں احساسات یا احساسات تنگی کی پیش بینی ہوتی ہیں اور احساسات کی تصدیق کرتی ہیں (بہت سی لیبل کلاسیک). مہربانی BiLSTM (دودئیرسیٹن لانگ-لنگ ٹرمن میموری) موڈل ہمارے سیستم کے لئے مہربانی کی گئی تھی۔ ہم BiLSTM کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کلمات معلومات دونوں طریقوں سے نکالے جائیں۔ ہر کلمہ کا اضافہ پانے کے لئے ذکر مکانیزین استعمال کیا گیا تھا. اس کے علاوہ، BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM کے ذریعہ توجه کے مکانیسم کے ذریعہ) پر بنیاد تھوڑے عمیق تعلیم الگوریتم مختلف سٹسٹ کے لئے استعمال کئے گئے۔ ہم نے ڈومین کے اضافہ اور قانونی کلاسپیٹ کے کاموں کے لئے استعمال کیا تھا اور بنیاس موڈل کے ذریعے سیکھنے کے طریقے استعمال کیا تھا۔ حالانکہ ایک بنسٹ موڈل multi-labels کام کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا تھا.', 'uz': "Biz ingliz va Ispanchaga barcha besh vazifalarda hissiyot tizimini bajardik. All subtasks involve emotion or sentiment intensity prediction (regression and ordinal classification) and emotions determining (multi-labels classification).  Name Biz ikkita oynalardan so'zlarni olish uchun BiLSTM'dan foydalanamiz. Ikki so'zlarni o'zgartirish uchun foydalanadi. Keyin, BiLSTMATT (binotim mekanisme bilan BiLSTM) asosida, bir necha o'rganish algoritlari boshqa vazifalar uchun ishlaydi. Qatlamni tahrirlash va oddiy darajalashning vazifalari uchun biz domen adapterini ishlatdik va o'rganish usullarini o'rganish mumkin. Bir xil asosiy modeli bir necha yorliq vazifa uchun ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đã thực hiện hệ thống đa cảm trong năm phần phụ đề tiếng Anh và Tây Ban Nha. Tất cả các yêu cầu phụ thuộc vào tính cảm xúc hay cường độ của cảm xúc (giai đoạn phục hồi và phân hạng bình) và cảm xúc quyết định (phân loại đa nhãn). The hữu dụng BiLSTM (Bidirection long-Short Memory) model with attention mechanism was mostly appreciated for our system. Chúng tôi dùng BiLSTM để lấy thông tin từ cả hai phương hướng. The attention mechanism was used to find the contribution of each words for import. Hơn nữa, dựa trên BiLSTM (BiLSTM with attention mechanism) một vài thuật toán học sâu được dùng cho các yêu cầu khác nhau. Chúng tôi sử dụng phương pháp sửa chữa miền và kết hợp học để sử dụng mô hình căn cứ. Trong khi một mô hình căn cứ đơn giản được dùng cho nhiệm vụ đa nhãn.', 'bg': 'Ние внедрихме сентименталната система във всичките пет подзадачи за английски и испански. Всички подзадачи включват прогнозиране на емоцията или интензивността на чувствата (регресия и ординална класификация) и определяне на емоциите (класификация с множество етикети). Полезният модел с механизъм за внимание беше приложен главно за нашата система. Използваме БиЛСТМ, за да извлечем информация от двете посоки. Механизмът за внимание беше използван, за да се намери приносът на всяка дума за подобряване на оценките. Освен това, въз основа на BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM с механизъм на внимание) няколко алгоритма за дълбоко обучение са използвани за различни подзадачи. За регресионни и ординални задачи за класификация използвахме домейн адаптация и ансамбълни методи за обучение, за да използваме базовия модел. Докато един базов модел беше използван за задача с множество етикети.', 'nl': 'We hebben het sentiment systeem geïmplementeerd in alle vijf subtaken voor Engels en Spaans. Alle subtaken omvatten emotie- of sentimentintensiteitsvoorspelling (regressie en ordinale classificatie) en emoties bepalen (multi-label classificatie). Het nuttige BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) model met aandachtsmechanisme werd voornamelijk toegepast op ons systeem. We gebruiken BiLSTM om woordinformatie uit beide richtingen te krijgen. Het aandachtsmechanisme werd gebruikt om de bijdrage van elk woord voor het verbeteren van de scores te vinden. Verder werden op basis van BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM met aandachtsmechanisme) enkele deep-learning algoritmes gebruikt voor verschillende subtaken. Voor regressie- en ordinale classificatietaken gebruikten we domeinadaptatie en ensembleleermethoden om basismodel te gebruiken. Terwijl een enkel basismodel werd gebruikt voor multi-labels taak.', 'da': 'Vi implementerede sentimentsystemet i alle fem underopgaver for engelsk og spansk. Alle underopgaver involverer forudsigelse af følelser eller følelsesintensitet (regression og ordinær klassificering) og bestemmelse af følelser (multi-labels klassificering). Den nyttige BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) model med opmærksomhedsmekanisme blev primært anvendt til vores system. Vi bruger BiLSTM til at få ordoplysninger udvundet fra begge retninger. Opmærksomhedsmekanismen blev brugt til at finde bidraget fra hvert ord til at forbedre scorerne. Desuden blev der baseret på BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM med opmærksomhedsmekanisme) anvendt nogle få deep-learning algoritmer til forskellige underopgaver. Til regressions- og ordinære klassifikationsopgaver brugte vi domænetilpasning og ensemble-læringsmetoder til at udnytte basismodellen. Mens en enkelt basismodel blev brugt til multi-labels opgave.', 'hr': 'Provodili smo sistem osjećanja u svih pet podupisa za engleski i španjolski. Svi podaci uključuju predviđanje emocija ili intenzitete osjećaja (regresija i redovna klasifikacija) i emocije koje određuju (klasifikacija višestrukih etiketa). Korisni model BiLSTM (dvosmjerna dugoročna uspomena) s mehanizam pažnje primjenjen je uglavnom za naš sustav. Koristimo BiLSTM kako bi dobili riječ informacije izvlačene iz oba smjera. Mehanizam pažnje je korišćen kako bi pronašao doprinos svake riječi za poboljšanje rezultata. Osim toga, na temelju BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM s mehanizam pažnje) poslužili su nekoliko algoritma dubokog učenja za različite podatake. Za zadatke regresije i uredne klasifikacije koristili smo adaptaciju domena i uključili metode učenja za primjenu baznog modela. Iako je jedan bazni model korišćen za zadatak višestrukih etiketa.', 'de': 'Wir haben das Sentiment-System in allen fünf Teilaufgaben für Englisch und Spanisch implementiert. Alle Teilaufgaben umfassen die Vorhersage der Emotion oder Sentiment Intensität (Regression und ordinale Klassifizierung) und die Bestimmung der Emotionen (Multi-Label Klassifizierung). Das nützliche BiLSTM (Bidirektional Long-Short Term Memory) Modell mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus wurde hauptsächlich für unser System verwendet. Wir verwenden BiLSTM, um Wortinformationen aus beiden Richtungen zu erhalten. Der Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus wurde verwendet, um den Beitrag jedes Wortes zur Verbesserung der Punktzahl zu finden. Weiterhin wurden basierend auf BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus) einige Deep-Learning Algorithmen für verschiedene Teilaufgaben eingesetzt. Für Regressions- und ordinale Klassifikationsaufgaben verwendeten wir Domänenanpassungs- und Ensemblelernmethoden, um das Basismodell zu nutzen. Während ein einziges Basismodell für Multi-Labels Aufgabe verwendet wurde.', 'ko': '우리는 영어와 스페인어의 다섯 가지 임무에서 모두 감정 체계를 실현하였다.모든 하위 임무는 정서나 정서 강도 예측(회귀와 순서 분류)과 정서 결정(다중 라벨 분류)과 관련된다.우리의 시스템은 주로 주의 메커니즘을 가진 양방향 장단시 기억 모델을 채택했다.BilSTM을 사용하여 두 방향에서 단어 정보를 추출합니다.주의 메커니즘은 모든 단어가 점수 향상에 기여하는 것을 발견하는 데 사용된다.또한 BILSMATT(주의 메커니즘을 가진 BILSTM)를 바탕으로 서로 다른 하위 임무에 대해 심도 있는 학습 알고리즘을 채택했다.회귀와 순서 분류 임무에 대해 우리는 영역 적응과 통합 학습 방법을 이용하여 기본 모델을 이용한다.단일 베이스 모델은 다중 탭 작업에 사용됩니다.', 'id': 'Kami menerapkan sistem sentimen dalam lima subtasks bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol. All subtasks involve emotion or sentiment intensity prediction (regression and ordinal classification) and emotions determining (multi-labels classification).  Model BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) berguna dengan mekanisme perhatian terutama diterapkan untuk sistem kita. Kami menggunakan BiLSTM untuk mendapatkan informasi kata ekstrak dari kedua arah. Mekanisme perhatian digunakan untuk menemukan kontribusi setiap kata untuk meningkatkan skor. Selain itu, berdasarkan BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM dengan mekanisme perhatian) beberapa algoritma belajar dalam digunakan untuk subtasks yang berbeda. Untuk tugas regresi dan klasifikasi ordinal kami menggunakan adaptasi domain dan ensemble metode belajar untuk menggunakan model dasar. Sementara satu model dasar digunakan untuk tugas multi-label.', 'sw': 'Tulitekeleza mfumo wa hisia katika kazi zote tano kwa Kiingereza na Kihispania. Kazi zote zinahusisha hisia au hisia kubwa ya utabiri (ukandamizaji na kutangazwa kwa kawaida) na hisia zinazoamua (kutangazwa kwa alama nyingi). The useful BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) model with attention mechanism was mainly applied for our system.  Tunatumia BiLSTM ili kupata taarifa zilizotolewa kutoka kwenye maeneo mawili. Mfumo wa ufuatiliaji ulitumiwa kutafuta mchango wa kila neno kwa kuboresha vipindi. Zaidi ya hayo, kwa kutumia BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM kwa mfumo wa ufuatiliaji) baadhi ya mialgorithi ya kujifunza za kina zilitumika kwa kazi tofauti. Kwa kazi za kudhibitiwa na kutangazwa kwa kawaida tulitumia kubadilishana kwa ndani na njia za kujifunza kwa kutumia mifano ya msingi. Wakati muundo mmoja wa msingi ulitumiwa kwa ajili ya kazi ya alama nyingi.', 'sq': 'Ne zbatuam sistemin e ndjenjave në të pesë nënkërkesat për anglisht dhe spanjoll. Të gjitha nëndetyrat përfshijnë parashikimin e intensitetit të emocioneve (regresion dhe klasifikim ordinal) dhe emocionet që përcaktojnë (klasifikim me shumë etiketa). Modeli i dobishëm BiLSTM (Memory Bidirectional Long-Short Term) me mekanizëm vëmendje u aplikua kryesisht për sistemin tonë. Ne përdorim BiLSTM për të marrë informacionin e fjalës të nxjerrë nga të dy drejtimet. Mekanizmi i vëmendjes u përdor për të gjetur kontributin e çdo fjale për përmirësimin e rezultateve. Përveç kësaj, bazuar në BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM me mekanizëm vëmendjeje) disa algoritme mësimi i thellë u përdorën për nëndetyra të ndryshme. Për detyrat e regresionit dhe klasifikimit ordinal ne përdorëm përshtatjen e domenit dhe mbledhim metodat e mësimit për të përdorur modelin bazë. Ndërsa një model bazë i vetëm u përdorë për detyrën me shumë etiketa.', 'am': 'በአምስት ደብዳቤዎች ላይ እንግሊዘኛ እና ስፓኒሽ መስኮቶች ውስጥ የስህተቱን ስርዓት አደረግን፡፡ ሁሉም ደብዳቤዎች የስሜት ወይም የስሜት ጉዳይ (አስተዳደር እና የባሕላዊ classification) እና አስተያየት (በብዙ-labels ክፍል) የሚያስፈልጉት ነው፡፡ የተጠቃሚ ቢልSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) ሞዴል በመጠቀም ማሰናከል በተጠቃሚ ስርዓታችን ተጠቃሚ ነበር። ከሁለቱ መንገዶች የቃላትን መረጃ ለማግኘት BiLSTM እንጠይቃለን፡፡ የጥያቄ ማሰናከል የቃላትን ለማሻሻል ለማግኘት ተጠቃሚ ነበር፡፡ ከዚህም ጋር በቢLSTMATT (ቢLSTM በጥልቅ ትምህርት ማሰናከያ) የተገኘ ጥቂቶች የጥልቅ ትምህርት አሌጎርቲም ለልዩ ደብዳቤ ስራ ተጠቃሚ ነበር፡፡ ለመግለጽ እና ለባሕላዊ መግለጫ ማድረጊያው የዶሜን አካባቢ እና የመማር ሥርዓት ለመጠቀም መሠረት ማድረጊያውን ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡ አንድ መደብ ሞዴል ለብዙ ምልክት ስራ በተጠቀም ጊዜ', 'hy': 'Մենք իրականացրեցինք զգացմունքների համակարգը անգլերեն և իսպաներեն բոլոր հինգ ենթաթերթերում: All subtasks involve emotion or sentiment intensity prediction (regression and ordinal classification) and emotions determining (multi-labels classification).  Ուշադրության մեխանիզմն ունի օգտակար ԲիLSԹՄ (երկարաուղղային երկարաժամկետ հիշողություն) մոդելը հիմնականում կիրառվել է մեր համակարգի համար: Մենք օգտագործում ենք ԲիLSԹՄ բառի տեղեկատվությունը ստանալու համար երկու ուղղություններից: Ուշադրության մեխանիզմը օգտագործվել է յուրաքանչյուր բառի ներդրումը գնահատելու համար: Ավելին, հիմնված ԲիLSԹՄԱՏ (ԲիLSԹՄ ուշադրության մեխանիզմի վրա) մի քանի խորը սովորելու ալգորիթմներ օգտագործվեցին տարբեր ենթախնդիրների համար: Ռեգրեսիայի և սովորական դասակարգման առաջադրանքների համար մենք օգտագործեցինք դասակարգման դասակարգման մեթոդներ և համադրեցինք ուսուցման մեթոդներ, որպեսզի օգտագործենք հիմնական մոդելը: Մինչդեռ մեկ հիմնական մոդել օգտագործվել էր բազմաթիկտակների խնդիրների համար:', 'fa': 'ما سیستم احساسات را در تمام پنج زیر درخواست انگلیسی و اسپانیایی انجام دادیم. تمامی زیر خواسته\u200cها شامل پیش\u200cبینی شدت احساسات یا احساسات و احساسات که تعیین می\u200cکنند (برگزیدن برچسب\u200cهای متعدد) و احساسات (برچسب\u200cهای متعدد). مدل استفاده BiLSTM (حافظه مدت طولانی کوتاه) با مکانیسم توجه در اصل برای سیستم ما درخواست شد. ما از BiLSTM استفاده می کنیم تا اطلاعات کلمه را از هر دو طرف خارج کنیم. این مکانیسم توجه برای پیدا کردن توجه هر کلمه برای بهترین امتیاز استفاده شد. علاوه بر این، بر اساس BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM با مکانیسم توجه) چند الگوریتم عمیق یادگیری برای زیربازهای مختلف استخدام می\u200cشوند. برای وظیفه\u200cهای جدایی و جدایی قانونی استفاده کردیم و از طریق یادگیری برای تأثیر مدل پایه استفاده کردیم. در حالی که یک مدل بنیادی برای کار بسیاری از برچسب استفاده می\u200cشود.', 'az': 'Biz İngilizce və İspanyolca hisslər sistemini beş hisslərdə istifadə etdik. Bütün aşağılıqlar duyguları və hisslərin şiddətli tədbirləri (regresiya və düzgün klasifikasiya) və duyguları (çoxlu etiketlər klasifikasiya) təyin edirlər. Məzmun mehanizmisi ilə faydalı BiLSTM modeli sistemimizə istifadə edildi. İki yöndən söz malümatını almaq üçün BiLSTM qullanırıq. Gözləri yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün hər sözün səbəbi tapmaq üçün gözləmə mehanizmisi istifadə edildi. Daha sonra, BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM məktəzisi ilə gözləmə məktəzisinə dayanan) bir neçə derin öyrənmə algoritmi müxtəlif dəstəklər üçün istifadə edildi. Reqresiya və düzgün klasifikasiya işləri üçün biz domena adaptasiyasını və baz modelini istifadə etmək üçün öyrənmə metodlarını istifadə etdik. Bir model çoxlu etiketli işlər üçün istifadə edilmişdi.', 'af': "Ons het die sentimentstelsel in alle vyf subtaske vir Engels en Spaanse gebruik. Alle subtaske involveer emosie of sentiment intensiteit voorskou (regresie en ordeel klasifikasie) en emosies wat bepaal (multi-etikette klasifikasie). Die bruikbare BiLSTM (Bidireksionale Lang- Kort Term Geheue) model met aandag mekanisme was hoofsaaklik aangepas vir ons stelsel. Ons gebruik BiLSTM om woord inligting uit beide rigtings te kry. Die aanmerking-mekanisme is gebruik om die bydraag van elke woord te vind vir die optelling te verbeter. Verder, gebaseer op BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM met aandag mekanisme) was 'n paar diep-leer algoritme gebruik vir verskillende subtaske. Vir regresie en ordenale klasifikasie-taak gebruik ons domein-aanpassing en versamel leer metodes om basis-model te verwyder. Terwyl 'n enkele basis model gebruik is vir multi- labels taak.", 'tr': 'Biz duýgular sistemasyny Iňlisçe we Ispanýolça üçin beş sany suratda guruldyk. Hemme süýtgeşmeler duýgym ýa duýgym agyrlamasynda (regressiýa we düzgün klasifikasyýa) we duýgymlar takyklaýarlar (multi-etiketler klasifikasyýa). Ullanyş BiLSTM (Bidirectional Uzyş Hata) nusgasy sistemimiz üçin ullanýardy. Her iki taraftan söz maglumaty almak üçin BiLSTM ulanýarys Diňleşen mehanizam netijesini geliştirmek üçin her sözüň gabdalygyny tapmak üçin ulanyldy. Mundan soňra, BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM üns meýdançasyna görä) birnäçe derin öwrenme algoritmalary farklı subtasklar üçin işledildi. Regressiya we düzenli klasifikasyon görevleri üçin biz domain adaptasyony ulandyk we baz modelini süýtgetmek üçin öwrenme yöntemleri birleşdirdik. Birnäçe etiket täblisasi üçin ýeke esasy nusga ullanýardy.', 'bn': 'আমরা ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশের জন্য পাঁচটি সাবট্যাকাজে আবেগ ব্যবস্থা বাস্তবায়িত করেছি। সকল সাবটাকাজের মধ্যে অনুভূতি অথবা অনুভূতির গভীর ভবিষ্যৎবাণীর মধ্যে রয়েছে (শাস্তি এবং সাধারণ শ্রেণীকরণ) এবং অনুভূতি সিদ্ধান্ত নির বিএলস্টিএম (বাইডেডিয়াল লম্বা- শর্ট মেমরি) মডেল, যার মনোযোগ মাধ্যমে আমাদের সিস্টেমের জন্য প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। আমরা বিএলস্টিম ব্যবহার করি দুই দিক থেকে বের করা তথ্য পাওয়ার জন্য। স্কোর উন্নতির জন্য প্রত্যেক শব্দের অবদান খুঁজে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। এছাড়াও, বিলস্টাম্যাট (বিএলস্টিএম এর মনোযোগ মাধ্যমে) ভিত্তিক কয়েকটি গভীর শিক্ষার অ্যালগরিদম বিভিন্ন সাবটাসের জন্য ব্ For regression and ordinal classification tasks we used domain adaptation and ensemble learning methods to leverage base model.  যখন একটি বেস মডেল বহুল লেবেল কাজের জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়।', 'bs': 'Implicirali smo sistem osjećanja u svih pet poduzeća za engleski i španjolski. Svi podaci uključuju predviđanje emocija ili intenzitete osjećaja (regresija i redovna klasifikacija) i emocije koje određuju (klasifikacija multietiketa). Korisni model BiLSTM (dvosmjerno dugoročna uspomena) s mehanizam pažnje uglavnom je primjenjen za naš sistem. Koristimo BiLSTM kako bi dobili riječ informacije izvlačene iz oba smjera. Mehanizam pažnje je korišćen kako bi pronašao doprinos svake riječi za poboljšanje rezultata. Osim toga, na temelju BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM sa mehanizam pažnje) poslužili su nekoliko algoritma dubokog učenja za različite podatake. Za odgovore regresije i uredne klasifikacije koristili smo adaptaciju domena i uključili metode učenja za primjenu baznog modela. Dok je jedan bazni model korišćen za multi-etikete zadatak.', 'cs': 'Systém sentimentů jsme implementovali ve všech pěti podúkolech pro angličtinu a španělštinu. Všechny dílčí úkoly zahrnují predikci intenzity emocí nebo sentimentu (regresní a ordinální klasifikace) a určování emocí (klasifikace více etiket). Pro náš systém byl aplikován především užitečný model BiLSTM (Bidirektional Long-Short Term Memory) s pozornostním mechanismem. Používáme BiLSTM, abychom získali slovní informace extrahované z obou směrů. Mechanismus pozornosti byl použit k nalezení přínosu každého slova pro zlepšení skóre. Dále bylo na základě BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM s mechanismem pozornosti) použito několik algoritmů hlubokého učení pro různé dílčí úkoly. Pro regresní a ordinální klasifikační úlohy jsme použili metody adaptace domén a souborového učení k využití základního modelu. Zatímco jeden základní model byl použit pro úlohu více štítků.', 'ca': "Vam implementar el sistema de sentiments en les cinc subtaskes d'anglès i espanyol. Totes les subtaskes impliquen predicció de l'intensitat emocional (regressió i classificació ordinal) i emocions determinants (classificació multietiquetes). El model útil de BiLSTM (Memoria Bidireccional a llarg i curt termini) amb mecanisme d'atenció va ser aplicat principalment al nostre sistema. Utilitzem BiLSTM per extrair informació de paraules de les dues direccions. El mecanisme d'atenció va ser utilitzat per trobar la contribució de cada paraula per millorar les puntuacions. A més, basat en BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM amb mecanisme d'atenció), alguns algoritmes d'aprenentatge profund van ser utilitzats per diferents subtaskes. For regression and ordinal classification tasks we used domain adaptation and ensemble learning methods to leverage base model.  Mentre que un únic model de base es va utilitzar per a la tasca de múltiples etiquetes.", 'et': 'Me rakendasime sentimentaalsüsteemi kõigis viies alamülesandes inglise ja hispaania keeles. Kõik alaülesanded hõlmavad emotsioonide või sentimentaalse intensiivsuse prognoosimist (regressioon ja ordinaalne klassifikatsioon) ja emotsioonide määramist (mitme sildi klassifikatsioon). Meie süsteemile rakendati peamiselt kasulikku tähelepanumehhanismiga BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) mudelit. Kasutame BiLSTM-i, et saada sõnateavet mõlemast suunast. Tähelepanu mehhanismi abil leiti iga sõna panus tulemuste parandamisse. Lisaks kasutati BiLSTMATT-i (tähelepanumehhanismiga BiLSTM) alusel erinevate alamülesannete jaoks mõningaid sügavõppe algoritme. Regressiooni- ja ordinaalklassifitseerimisülesannete jaoks kasutasime baasmudeli kasutamiseks domeeni kohandamise ja ansambli õppemeetodeid. Mitme sildi ülesandeks kasutati ühte baasmudelit.', 'fi': 'Toteutimme tunnejärjestelmän kaikissa viidessä englannin ja espanjan alatehtävässä. Kaikki alitehtävät sisältävät tunteiden tai tunteiden voimakkuuden ennustamisen (regressio ja ordinaaliluokitus) ja tunteiden määrittämisen (moniniminen luokitus). Hyödyllistä BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) -mallia huomiomekanismilla sovellettiin pääasiassa järjestelmäämme. Käytämme BiLSTM:ää saadaksemme sanatiedon poimituksi molemmista suunnista. Tarkastusmekanismin avulla löydettiin kunkin sanan vaikutus pisteiden parantamiseen. Lisäksi BiLSTMATT:n (BiLSTM with attention mechanism) pohjalta käytettiin muutamia syväoppimisalgoritmeja eri alatehtäviin. Regressio- ja ordinaaliluokitustehtävissä käytimme domain adaptointia ja ensemble-oppimismenetelmiä pohjamallin hyödyntämiseksi. Kun taas yksi perusmalli käytettiin usean tarran tehtävään.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngewehke sistem Seneng kanggo limo dolanan kanggo ingkang karo Spanyala. Lah Ndukuni angan langgar mlebu génering cuasat karo cap énwisi (régleksi karo kelas ordinal) lan cuasat seneng pisan (geklasipun multi-label). Peringatan BiLTT Awak dhéwé nggunakake BiLA Mehanistik perbudhakan sing wis nggawe penting nggo wong seneng pisan kanggo nggawe gerakan sing nggawe gerakan. Label, basa kang BiSLT MATT For Regresion and ordinal CLASS tasks we used domain modification and ensensembedle Learn Methods to raise basic model. Samsul', 'sk': 'Sistem sentimenta smo uvedli v vseh petih podnalogah za angleščino in španščino. Vse podnaloge vključujejo napoved intenzivnosti čustev ali sentimentalne intenzivnosti (regresija in ordinalna klasifikacija) in določanje čustev (klasifikacija z več oznakami). Za naš sistem smo v glavnem uporabljali uporaben model BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) z mehanizmom pozornosti. BiLSTM uporabljamo za pridobivanje besednih informacij iz obeh smeri. Z mehanizmom pozornosti smo našli prispevek vsake besede za izboljšanje rezultatov. Poleg tega je bilo na podlagi BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM z mehanizmom pozornosti) uporabljenih nekaj algoritmov globokega učenja za različne podnaloge. Za regresijske in ordinalne klasifikacijske naloge smo uporabili domenske prilagoditve in metode ensemble učenja za izkoriščanje osnovnega modela. Medtem ko je bil za opravilo z več oznakami uporabljen en osnovni model.', 'ha': "Mun cika matsayin hisãbi cikin dukkan taskõki 5 na Ingiriya da Isbanish. Dukan aikin da ke ƙunsa da hisia ko hisia mai gabani (kizge da classifori na ɗabi'a) da hisia masu yin rubutu (classified cikin alama masu yawa). @ action: button Munã amfani da BiLSM don mu sami maganar da aka samu daga duk hanyõyi biyu. Ana amfani da alamar muhimmanci dõmin a sami ƙari kowace kalma. Furan haka, a kan bincike na BiLStMANT (BiLSM da mekaninsa na aikin algoritm kaɗan da aka sanar da masu duhu. Kuwo wa aikin canza taƙaitacce da mai kawaici, mun yi amfani da adadin Domen da za'a yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka da za'a samu'a wa misalin salon da za'a yi amfani da. While a single base model was used for multi-labels task.", 'he': 'הפענו את מערכת הרגשות בכל חמישה תחתונות לאנגלית וספרדית. כל תחתיות מעורבות צפייה של אינטנסיבות רגשות או רגשות (מחזור וסיפור מיוחד) ורגשות קובעות (מסיפור של תוויות רבות). מודל BiLSTM (זכרון ביכיוון ארוך-קצר) שימושי עם מנגנון תשומת לב הופעל בעיקר למערכת שלנו. אנו משתמשים בבילסטם כדי לקבל מידע מילה מווצא משני הכיוונים. מנגנון תשומת לב השתמש כדי למצוא את התרומה של כל מילה לשפר את התוצאות. בנוסף, בהתבסס על BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM עם מנגנון תשומת לב) כמה אלגוריתמים למידה עמוקה הועסקו עבור תחתונים שונים. For regression and ordinal classification tasks we used domain adaptation and ensemble learning methods to leverage base model.  בעוד דוגמנית בסיסית אחת השתמשה במשימה של תוויות רבות.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་5རྗེས་སུ་སྒེར་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། All subtasks involve emotion or sentiment intensity prediction (regression and ordinal classification) and emotions determining (multi-labels classification). The useful BiLSTM (Bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory) model with attention mechanism was mainly applied for our system. ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་ནས་ཕྱིར་ཐུབ་པའི་BiLSTM་སྤྱོད་པ ཐ་སྙད་རེར་རེ་རེའི་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐུབ་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་ལག་ལེན་བྱས་ཡོད། Furthermore, based on BiLSTMATT (BiLSTM with attention mechanism) a few deep-learning algorithms were employed for different subtasks. For regression and ordinal classification tasks we used domain adaptation and ensemble learning methods to leverage base model. ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་ཤོག་བྱང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ལས་འགུལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྨས་གཞི་གཅིག་པ་ཞིག་རེད།'}
{'en': 'UG18 at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Generating Additional Training Data for Predicting Emotion Intensity in Spanish', 'ar': 'UG18 في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: إنشاء بيانات تدريب إضافية للتنبؤ بكثافة العاطفة باللغة الإسبانية', 'pt': 'UG18 no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Gerando Dados Adicionais de Treinamento para Previsão da Intensidade Emocional em Espanhol', 'es': 'UG18 en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Generación de datos de entrenamiento adicionales para predecir la intensidad de las emociones en español', 'fr': "UG18 au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Générer des données d'entraînement supplémentaires pour prédire l'intensité des émotions en espagnol", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のUG 18タスク1 ：スペイン語で感情の強さを予測するための追加のトレーニングデータの生成', 'zh': 'UG18 at SemEval-2018 务1:额外训练,以西班牙语占情', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर UG18: स्पेनिश में भावना तीव्रता की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए अतिरिक्त प्रशिक्षण डेटा उत्पन्न करना', 'ru': 'UG18 на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Генерирование дополнительных данных обучения для прогнозирования интенсивности эмоций на испанском языке', 'ga': 'UG18 ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Sonraí Oiliúna Breise a Ghiniúint chun Déine Mothúcháin a Thuar sa Spáinnis', 'ka': 'UG18 SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 1: დამატებული განათლების მონაცემების შექმნა სპექციალური ინტენტივისტია სპანელში', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Δημιουργία συμπληρωματικών δεδομένων κατάρτισης για την πρόβλεψη της συναισθηματικής έντασης στα ισπανικά', 'hu': 'UG18 at SemEval-2018 feladat 1: További edzési adatok generálása az érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzéséhez spanyol nyelven', 'it': "UG18 a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Generare ulteriori dati di allenamento per predire l'intensità emotiva in spagnolo", 'kk': 'UG18 жарым- 2018 тапсырмасының 1- тапсырмасы: Испан тілінде көңіл күй- жайымдылығының қосымша оқыту деректерін құру', 'mk': 'UG18 на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Генерација на дополнителни податоци за обука за предвидување на емоционална интензитет на шпански', 'lt': 'UG18 posėdyje „SemEval-2018“ 1 užduotis: papildomų mokymo duomenų, skirtų jautrumo intensyvumui prognozuoti ispanų kalba, sukūrimas', 'ms': 'UG18 pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Menjana Data Latihan Tambahan untuk Menyegerakkan Intensiti Emosi dalam bahasa Sepanyol', 'mt': 'UG18 f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Dejta ta’ Taħriġ Addizzjonali għat-Tbassir ta’ Intensità Emozzjonali bl-Ispanjol', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1: സ്പാനിഷില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'UG18 at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Generating Additional Training Data for Predicting Emotion Intensity in Spanish', 'pl': 'UG18 na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Generowanie dodatkowych danych treningowych do przewidywania intensywności emocji w języku hiszpańskim', 'ro': 'UG18 la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Generarea de date suplimentare de antrenament pentru predicția intensității emoționale în limba spaniolă', 'no': 'UG18 på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Lagar ekstra øvingsdata for førehandsvising av emosjonsintensitet i spansk', 'sr': 'UG18 na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 1: Generiranje dodatnih podataka obuke za predviđanje intenzitete emocija na španjolskom', 'si': '@ info', 'sv': 'UG18 på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Generera ytterligare träningsdata för att förutsäga känslointensitet på spanska', 'so': 'UG18 at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Generating Data Additional Training for Predicting Emotion Intensity Ispanish', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் UG18: ஸ்பானிஷில் கூடுதல் பயிற்சி தகவல் உருவாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'UG18 ٹاکس ۱ میں سموئل-2018 ٹاکس میں: اسپانیایی میں اضافہ ترین ڈاکٹ پیدا کرنے کے لئے اضافہ ترین ڈاکٹ پیدا کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 vazifa 1: Ispanchaga Predicting Emotion Intensity uchun Qoʻshimcha Training Data Generating', 'vi': 'Nông sản tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvol 1: Tạo dữ liệu đào tạo thêm cho kích thích đa cảm theo tiếng Tây Ban Nha.', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Генериране на допълнителни тренировъчни данни за предсказване на емоционалната интензивност на испански език', 'da': 'UG18 på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Generering af yderligere træningsdata til forudsigelse af følelsesintensitet på spansk', 'nl': 'UG18 op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Het genereren van aanvullende trainingsgegevens voor het voorspellen van emotionele intensiteit in het Spaans', 'hr': 'UG18 na zadatku 1. polovične ocjene 2018: Generiranje dodatnih podataka obuke za predviđanje intenzitete emocija na španjolskom', 'de': 'Aufgabe 1: Generierung zusätzlicher Trainingsdaten zur Vorhersage der Emotionsintensität auf Spanisch', 'fa': 'UG18 در ماموریت ۱: تولید داده های آموزش اضافه برای پیش\u200cبینی هوشمندگی احساسات در اسپانیایی', 'id': 'UG18 di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Menjana Data Pelatihan Tambahan untuk memprediksi Intensitas Emosi dalam bahasa Spanyol', 'ko': 'UG18 SemEval-2018에서의 퀘스트 1: 스페인어의 정서 강도를 예측하는 추가 훈련 데이터 생성', 'sw': 'UG18 katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Kutengeneza Data ya Ufunzi wa Zaidi kwa Kujiandaa Uhamiaji wa Kihispania', 'tr': 'UG18 at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Generating Additional Training Data for Predicting Emotion Intensity in Spanish', 'sq': 'UG18 në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Gjenerimi i të dhënave shtesë të trainimit për parashikimin e intensitetit të emocioneve në spanjoll', 'af': 'UG18 by SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Genereer Additional Training Data for Predicting Emotion Intensity in Spanish', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 1: Generating Additional Training Data for Predicting Emotion Intensity in Spanish', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: 캻spanyolca Emotion Intensity t톛siri 칲칞칲n 톛lav톛 t톛hsil veril톛n', 'hy': 'UG18-ը, 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի առաջին խնդիրը. Ավելացուցիչ ուսուցման տվյալներ ստեղծելը զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության իսպաներեն կանխատեսելու համար', 'bs': 'UG18 na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 1: Generiranje dodatnih podataka obuke za predviđanje intenzitete emocija na španjolskom', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ১-এ ইউজি১৮: স্প্যানিশ ভাষায় স্বয়ংক্রিয় ইমোটেশন সংক্রান্ত তথ্য তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Úkol 1: Generování dalších tréninkových dat pro predikci emoční intenzity ve španělštině', 'et': 'UG18 SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: täiendavate koolitusandmete loomine emotsioonide intensiivsuse prognoosimiseks hispaania keeles', 'fi': 'UG18 SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Lisäharjoitustietojen luominen tunnetehokkuuden ennustamiseen espanjaksi', 'ca': 'UG18 a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Generating Additional Training Data for Predicting Emotional Intensity in Spanish', 'jv': 'Language', 'sk': 'UG18 na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Ustvarjanje dodatnih podatkov o usposabljanju za napovedovanje intenzivnosti čustev v španščini', 'ha': '@ item Spelling dictionary', 'he': 'UG18 ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: יצירת נתונים אימונים נוספים לנחש אינטנסיבות רגשות בספרדית', 'bo': 'UG18 at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Generating Additional Training Data for Predicting Emotion Intensity in Spanish'}
{'en': 'The present study describes our submission to SemEval 2018 Task 1 : Affect in Tweets. Our Spanish-only approach aimed to demonstrate that it is beneficial to automatically generate additional training data by (i) translating training data from other languages and (ii) applying a semi-supervised learning method. We find strong support for both approaches, with those models outperforming our regular models in all subtasks. However, creating a stepwise ensemble of different models as opposed to simply averaging did not result in an increase in performance. We placed second (EI-Reg), second (EI-Oc), fourth (V-Reg) and fifth (V-Oc) in the four Spanish subtasks we participated in.', 'ar': 'تصف الدراسة الحالية تقديمنا إلى SemEval 2018 المهمة 1: التأثير في التغريدات. يهدف نهجنا الخاص بالإسبانية فقط إلى إثبات أنه من المفيد إنشاء بيانات تدريب إضافية تلقائيًا عن طريق (1) ترجمة بيانات التدريب من لغات أخرى و (2) تطبيق طريقة تعلم شبه خاضعة للإشراف. نجد دعمًا قويًا لكلا النهجين ، حيث تفوقت تلك النماذج على نماذجنا العادية في جميع المهام الفرعية. ومع ذلك ، فإن إنشاء مجموعة متدرجة من النماذج المختلفة بدلاً من المتوسط البسيط لم ينتج عنه زيادة في الأداء. وضعنا المركز الثاني (EI-Reg) ، والثاني (EI-Oc) ، والرابع (V-Reg) ، والخامس (V-Oc) في المهام الفرعية الإسبانية الأربع التي شاركنا فيها.', 'fr': "La présente étude décrit notre soumission à SemEval 2018 Task 1\xa0: Affect in Tweets. Notre approche uniquement en espagnol visait à démontrer qu'il est avantageux de générer automatiquement des données de formation supplémentaires en (i) traduisant les données de formation d'autres langues et (ii) en appliquant une méthode d'apprentissage semi-supervisée. Nous trouvons un soutien solide pour les deux approches, ces modèles surpassant nos modèles habituels dans toutes les sous-tâches. Cependant, la création d'un ensemble pas à pas de différents modèles au lieu d'une simple moyenne n'a pas entraîné d'augmentation des performances. Nous nous sommes classés deuxième (EI-Reg), deuxième (EI-oc), quatrième (V-Reg) et cinquième (V-Oc) dans les quatre sous-tâches espagnoles auxquelles nous avons participé.", 'pt': 'O presente estudo descreve nossa submissão ao SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets. Nossa abordagem somente em espanhol teve como objetivo demonstrar que é benéfico gerar automaticamente dados de treinamento adicionais (i) traduzindo dados de treinamento de outros idiomas e (ii) aplicando um método de aprendizado semi-supervisionado. Encontramos forte suporte para ambas as abordagens, com esses modelos superando nossos modelos regulares em todas as subtarefas. No entanto, criar um conjunto passo a passo de diferentes modelos em vez de simplesmente calcular a média não resultou em um aumento no desempenho. Ficamos em segundo (EI-Reg), segundo (EI-Oc), quarto (V-Reg) e quinto (V-Oc) nas quatro subtarefas espanholas em que participamos.', 'es': 'El presente estudio describe nuestra presentación a la Tarea 1 de SemEval 2018: Efecto en los Tweets. Nuestro enfoque solo en español tenía como objetivo demostrar que es beneficioso generar automáticamente datos de capacitación adicionales mediante (i) la traducción de los datos de capacitación de otros idiomas y (ii) la aplicación de un método de aprendizaje semisupervisado. Encontramos un fuerte apoyo para ambos enfoques, y esos modelos superan a nuestros modelos habituales en todas las subtareas. Sin embargo, la creación de un conjunto gradual de diferentes modelos en lugar de simplemente promediar no resultó en un aumento del rendimiento. Quedamos en segundo lugar (Ei-Reg), segundo (Ei-OC), cuarto (V-Reg) y quinto (V-Oc) en las cuatro subtareas en español en las que participamos.', 'ja': '本研究では、SemEval 2018タスク1 ： Tweetsへの影響について説明します。私たちのスペイン語のみのアプローチは、(i)他の言語からのトレーニングデータの翻訳、および(ii)半監督下の学習方法を適用することによって、追加のトレーニングデータを自動的に生成することが有益であることを実証することを目的としています。これらのモデルはすべてのサブタスクで通常のモデルよりも優れているため、両方のアプローチを強力にサポートしています。しかし、単純な平均化とは対照的に、異なるモデルの段階的なアンサンブルを作成しても、パフォーマンスの向上にはつながりませんでした。参加した4つのスペインのサブタスクのうち、2番目（ EI - Reg ）、2番目（ EI - Oc ）、4番目（ V - Reg ）、5番目（ V - Oc ）に配置しました。', 'zh': '本研述了我们提交给SemEval 2018 Task 1:Tweets中的影响。 臣等西班牙语旨在证明,(i)从他语译练数(ii)宜用半督学,自生额外训练数有益。 吾见二者皆得其力,皆优于吾常。 然创制不同之渐合而非简均不致性能之崇也。 四西班牙语子之事,各得二(EI-Reg)、二(EI-Oc)、第四名(V-Reg)、五(V-Oc)。', 'hi': 'वर्तमान अध्ययन SemEval 2018 कार्य 1 के लिए हमारे सबमिशन का वर्णन करता है: Tweets में प्रभाव। हमारे स्पैनिश-केवल दृष्टिकोण का उद्देश्य यह प्रदर्शित करना है कि (i) अन्य भाषाओं से प्रशिक्षण डेटा का अनुवाद करके और (ii) अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित सीखने की विधि को लागू करके अतिरिक्त प्रशिक्षण डेटा स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न करना फायदेमंद है। हम दोनों दृष्टिकोणों के लिए मजबूत समर्थन पाते हैं, उन मॉडलों के साथ सभी उप-कार्यों में हमारे नियमित मॉडल को पछाड़ते हैं। हालांकि, केवल औसत के विपरीत विभिन्न मॉडलों का एक चरणबद्ध पहनावा बनाने के परिणामस्वरूप प्रदर्शन में वृद्धि नहीं हुई। हमने चार स्पेनिश उप-कार्यों में दूसरे (ईआई-रेग), दूसरे (ईआई-ओसी), चौथे (वी-रेग) और पांचवें (वी-ओसी) को रखा, जिनमें हमने भाग लिया था।', 'ru': 'Настоящее исследование описывает наше участие в SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets. Наш подход, основанный только на испанском языке, был направлен на то, чтобы продемонстрировать, что полезно автоматически генерировать дополнительные учебные данные путем (i) перевода учебных данных с других языков и (ii) применения полунадзорного метода обучения. Мы находим твердую поддержку обоим подходам, при этом эти модели превосходят наши обычные модели во всех подзадачах. Однако создание поэтапного набора различных моделей в отличие от простого усреднения не привело к повышению производительности. Мы заняли второе место (EI-Reg), второе (EI-Oc), четвертое (V-Reg) и пятое (V-Oc) места в четырех испанских подзадачах, в которых мы участвовали.', 'ga': 'Déanann an staidéar reatha cur síos ar ár n-aighneacht do SemEval 2018 Tasc 1: Affect in Tweets. Bhí sé mar aidhm ag ár gcur chuige Spáinnis-amháin a léiriú go bhfuil sé tairbheach sonraí oiliúna breise a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch trí (i) sonraí oiliúna a aistriú ó theangacha eile agus (ii) modh foghlama leath-mhaoirsithe a chur i bhfeidhm. Faighimid tacaíocht láidir don dá chur chuige, agus na múnlaí sin ag dul i bhfeidhm níos fearr ar na múnlaí rialta atá againn i ngach fothasc. Mar sin féin, níor tháinig méadú ar fheidhmíocht mar thoradh ar ensemble de réir a chéile a chruthú de mhúnlaí difriúla seachas meánú simplí. Chuireamar an dara háit (EI-Reg), an dara (EI-Oc), an ceathrú (V-Reg) agus an cúigiú (V-Oc) sna ceithre fhothasc Spáinneach ar ghlac muid páirt iontu.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα μελέτη περιγράφει την υποβολή μας στο έργο 1: Επίδραση στα tweets. Η προσέγγισή μας μόνο στα ισπανικά είχε ως στόχο να καταδείξει ότι είναι ευεργετική η αυτόματη δημιουργία πρόσθετων δεδομένων κατάρτισης μέσω (i) της μετάφρασης δεδομένων κατάρτισης από άλλες γλώσσες και (ii) της εφαρμογής μιας μεθόδου μάθησης ημι-εποπτευμένης. Βρίσκουμε ισχυρή υποστήριξη και για τις δύο προσεγγίσεις, με αυτά τα μοντέλα να ξεπερνούν τα κανονικά μοντέλα μας σε όλες τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Ωστόσο, η δημιουργία ενός σταδιακού συνόλου διαφορετικών μοντέλων σε αντίθεση με τον απλό μέσο όρο δεν είχε ως αποτέλεσμα αύξηση της απόδοσης. Τοποθετηθήκαμε δεύτερη (EI-Reg), δεύτερη (EI-Oc), τέταρτη (V-Reg) και πέμπτη (V-Oc) στις τέσσερις ισπανικές υποτάξεις στις οποίες συμμετείχαμε.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 feladat 1: hatás tweetekben című benyújtásunkat. Csak spanyol nyelvű megközelítésünk célja annak bizonyítása, hogy előnyös automatikusan további képzési adatokat generálni (i) a képzési adatok más nyelvekről történő lefordításával és (ii) egy félig felügyelt tanulási módszer alkalmazásával. Mindkét megközelítés erőteljes támogatását találjuk, mivel ezek a modellek minden részfeladatban felülmúlják hagyományos modelljeinket. Azonban a különböző modellek fokozatos együttesének létrehozása az egyszerű átlagosítással szemben nem eredményezte a teljesítmény növekedését. Második (EI-Reg), második (EI-Oc), negyedik (V-Reg) és ötödik (V-Oc) helyeztünk el a négy spanyol részfeladatban, amelyben részt vettünk.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე სწავლაში ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო 2018 სამუშაო პროგრამა 1: ტვირში შემდეგ. ჩვენი მხოლოდ სპეციალური პროგრამის მიხედვით, რომ საკუთარი გამოსახულებელია ავტომატურად განახლების მონაცემების შემდეგ i) განახლების მონაცემების განახლების სხვა ენებიდან და ii) განახლების ნახევარჯ ჩვენ ძალიან ძალიან დაეხმარება ორივე დახმარებისთვის, რომლებიც ეს მოდელები ჩვენი რედალური მოდელების გამოყენება ყველა სკენ. მაგრამ, განსხვავებული მოდელების შექმნა სტაპექტის შექმნა, როგორც მხოლოდ განსხვავებული მოდელების განმავლობაში არ გავამუშავებო პროცექტის ზომას. ჩვენ მეორე (EI-Reg), მეორე (EI-Oc), მეოთხედი (V-Reg) და მეხუთე (V-Oc) ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაკეთეთეთ ოთხი სპანელი სტატისში.', 'kk': 'Қазіргі зерттеу біздің 2018 жылдың бірінші тапсырмасына келтірімізді таңдайды: Твиттердің әсері. Біздің испан тәсіліміздің тек қана тілдерінен аудару мәліметтерді (i) басқа тілдерден аудару және (ii) жарты бақылау тәсілі қолдану үшін қосымша оқыту мәліметін автоматты түрде құру мүмкінді Біз екі жағдай жағдай үшін күшті қолдауды табуыз. Бұл үлгілер өзіміздің үлгілеріміздің әдетті үлгілерімізге арналған. Бірақ, бірнеше үлгілердің шамасын құру үшін бірнеше үлгілерді орташа деңгейінде орташа деңгейіндегі шамасын өзгертуге болмады. Біз екіншіден (EI-Reg), екіншіден (EI-Oc), төртіншіден (V-Reg) пен бесіншіден (V-Oc) төртінші испан субсаттарына қолдандық.', 'it': 'Il presente studio descrive la nostra presentazione a SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets. Il nostro approccio basato esclusivamente sullo spagnolo mirava a dimostrare che è utile generare automaticamente ulteriori dati formativi (i) traducendo dati formativi da altre lingue e (ii) applicando un metodo di apprendimento semi-supervisionato. Troviamo un forte supporto per entrambi gli approcci, con quei modelli che superano i nostri modelli regolari in tutte le sottoattività. Tuttavia, la creazione di un insieme graduale di modelli diversi rispetto alla semplice media non ha comportato un aumento delle prestazioni. Ci siamo piazzati secondo (EI-Reg), secondo (EI-Oc), quarto (V-Reg) e quinto (V-Oc) nelle quattro sottoattività spagnole a cui abbiamo partecipato.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പഠനം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ജോലിക്ക് ഞങ്ങളുടെ സമ്മാനം വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സ്പാനിഷ് മാത്രം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സ്പാനിഷ് മാത്രം പരിശീലിക്കുന്നത് സ്വയം കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതി രണ്ട് വഴികള്\u200dക്കും ശക്തിയുള്ള പിന്തുണയും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ സാധാരണ മോഡലുകള്\u200d എല്ലാ ഉപജോലികളിലും പ എങ്കിലും വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലുകളുടെ സ്റ്റേബിള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ്ത മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി മാത്രമാണ് ശരീരത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തേതായി (EI-Reg), രണ്ടാമത്തേത് (EI-Oc), നാലാമത്തേത് (V-Reg) ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന നാല് സ്പാനിഷ് ഉപാധികളില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്നു.', 'ms': 'Ujian ini menggambarkan penghantaran kita ke SemEval 2018 Tugas 1: Kesan dalam Tweets. Pendekatan Sepanyol-sahaja kami bertujuan untuk menunjukkan bahawa i a berguna untuk secara automatik menghasilkan data latihan tambahan dengan (i) menerjemahkan data latihan dari bahasa lain dan (ii) melaksanakan kaedah belajar setengah diawasi. Kami mencari sokongan kuat untuk kedua-dua pendekatan, dengan model-model itu melebihi model biasa kami dalam semua subtasks. Namun, mencipta kumpulan langkah-langkah dari model yang berbeza selain daripada purata tidak menghasilkan peningkatan prestasi. We placed second (EI-Reg), second (EI-Oc), fourth (V-Reg) and fifth (V-Oc) in the four Spanish subtasks we participated in.', 'lt': 'Šiame tyrime apibūdinamas mūsų pateiktas 2018 m. SemEval 1 uždavinys „Poveikis Tweetuose“. Mūsų vienintelis Ispanijos metodas buvo skirtas įrodyti, kad naudinga automatiškai gauti papildomus mokymo duomenis: i) vertant mokymo duomenis i š kitų kalbų ir ii) taikant pusiau prižiūrimą mokymosi metodą. Mes esame tvirtai remiami abiem metodais, kai šie modeliai yra didesni už mūsų įprastus modelius visose paklausose. However, creating a stepwise ensemble of different models as opposed to simply averaging did not result in an increase in performance.  Antrąjį (EI-Reg), antrąjį (EI-Oc), ketvirtąjį (V-Reg) ir penktąjį (V-Oc) įtraukėme į keturis Ispanijos paklausimus, kuriuose dalyvavome.', 'mk': 'Оваа студија го опишува нашето поднесување на SemEval 2018 задача 1: Влијание на Твитови. Нашиот единствен шпански пристап имаше за цел да покаже дека е корисно автоматски да се генерираат дополнителни податоци за обука преку (i) преведување на податоци за обука од други јазици и (ii) апликација на полунадгледуван метод на учење. Најдовме силна поддршка за двата пристапи, со моделите кои ги надминуваат нашите редовни модели во сите потпрашања. Сепак, создавањето чекорен ансембл на различни модели наместо едноставно просекување не резултираше со зголемување на резултатите. We placed second (EI-Reg), second (EI-Oc), fourth (V-Reg) and fifth (V-Oc) in the four Spanish subtasks we participated in.', 'mt': 'Dan l-istudju jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjoni tagħna lil SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affett in Tweets. L-approċċ Spanjol tagħna uniku kellu l-għan li juri li huwa ta’ benefiċċju li tiġi ġġenerata awtomatikament dejta addizzjonali ta’ taħriġ billi (i) tiġi tradotta dejta ta’ taħriġ minn lingwi oħra u (ii) jiġi applikat metodu ta’ tagħlim semisuperviż. Aħna nsibu appoġġ qawwi għaż-żewġ approċċi, b’dawk il-mudelli li jaqbżu l-mudelli regolari tagħna fis-sottomistoqsijiet kollha. Madankollu, il-ħolqien ta’ ġabra gradwali ta’ mudelli differenti minflok sempliċement medjar ma rriżultax f’żieda fil-prestazzjoni. Qiegħdin it-tieni (EI-Reg), it-tieni (EI-Oc), ir-raba’ (V-Reg) u l-ħames (V-Oc) fl-erba’ sottomistoqsijiet Spanjoli li pparteċipawna fihom.', 'mn': 'Харин одоогийн судалгаанд бидний 2018 оны SemEval-ын 1-р ажил: Tweets-д нөлөөлдөг. Бидний Испанийн зөвхөн арга зам нь өөрсдийн хэлээс дасгал өгөгдлийг автоматжуулахад ашигтай гэдгийг харуулахын тулд (i) дасгал өгөгдлийг бусад хэлээс орлуулж, хагас удирдлагатай суралцах арга зам ашиглаж байна. Бид эдгээр загварууд бидний энгийн загваруудыг бүх суурь загваруудын тулд хүчтэй дэмжиж олдог. Гэхдээ өөр өөр загваруудыг бий болгоход дундаж үзүүлэлтийн нэмэгдүүлэлт гаргадаггүй. Бид хоёр дахь (EI-Reg), хоёр дахь (EI-Oc), дөрөв (V-Reg), таван (V-Oc) болон 4 Испаны сургуульд оролцсон.', 'no': 'Den gjeldande studien beskriver vår tilføring til semiEval 2018 oppgåve 1: Etter tweets. Det kun spanske tilnærminga vårt er målet å demonstrere at det er nyttig å automatisk laga fleire opplæringsdata ved i) omsetjing av opplæringsdata frå andre språk og ii) som brukar ein semioversikt læringsmetode. Vi finn sterk støtte for begge tilnærmingar, med dei modelane som utfører våre regulære modeller i alle underspørsmåla. Men å laga eit steg-punkt på forskjellige modeller mot enkelt gjennomsnittet resulterte ikkje i eit økt utvikling. Vi plassere andre (EI-Reg), andre (EI-Oc), fjerde (V-Reg) og femte (V-Oc) i dei fire spanske subtaskane vi delta i.', 'pl': 'Niniejsze opracowanie opisuje naszą zgłoszenie do SemEval 2018 Zadanie 1: Efekt w Tweetach. Nasze podejście wyłącznie w języku hiszpańskim miało na celu wykazanie, że korzystne jest automatyczne generowanie dodatkowych danych szkoleniowych poprzez (i) tłumaczenie danych szkoleniowych z innych języków i (ii) stosowanie metody nauki pół-nadzorowanej. Znajdujemy silne poparcie dla obu podejść, przy czym modele te przewyższają nasze zwykłe modele we wszystkich podzadaniach. Jednak stworzenie stopniowego zespołu różnych modeli w przeciwieństwie do zwykłego uśredniania nie skutkowało wzrostem wydajności. Mieliśmy drugie miejsce (EI-Reg), drugie (EI-Oc), czwarty (V-Reg) i piąte (V-Oc) w czterech hiszpańskich podzadaniach, w których uczestniczyliśmy.', 'ro': 'Prezentul studiu descrie prezentarea noastră la SemEval 2018 Task 1: Afect in Tweets. Abordarea noastră numai în limba spaniolă a urmărit să demonstreze că este benefică generarea automată de date suplimentare de formare prin (i) traducerea datelor de formare din alte limbi și (ii) aplicarea unei metode de învățare semi-supravegheate. Găsim un sprijin puternic pentru ambele abordări, aceste modele depășind modelele noastre obișnuite în toate subactivitățile. Cu toate acestea, crearea unui ansamblu treptat de modele diferite, spre deosebire de simpla medie, nu a dus la o creștere a performanței. Am plasat pe locul doi (EI-Reg), al doilea (EI-Oc), al patrulea (V-Reg) și al cincilea (V-Oc) în cele patru subactivități spaniole la care am participat.', 'sr': 'U sadašnjoj studiji opisuje našu predanost SemEval 2018 zadatku 1: utjecaj na Tweets. Naš jedini španjolski pristup je cilj da pokaže da je korisno automatski proizvesti dodatne podatke o obuci po i) prevoditi podatke o obuci iz drugih jezika i ii) primjenjivati metodu učenja polu nadzornog nadzora. Našli smo jaku podršku obe pristupe, s tim modelima koji su nadmašili naše redovne modele u svim podrškama. Međutim, stvorenje koraka iz grupe različitih modela, suprotno jednostavnom prosječavanju, nije rezultiralo povećanje učinka. Stavili smo drugu (EI-Reg), drugu (EI-Oc), četvrtinu (V-Reg) i petu (V-Oc) u četiri španjolske podatke u koje smo učestvovali.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada joogtada ah waxaa ku qoran muujintayada aan u dhiibayno SemEval 2018 shaqo 1: saameyn ku yeelan Twitteet. Dhaqdhaqaalka Isbanishka oo kaliya ayaa loola jeedaa in ay faa’iido u leedahay in automatic abuuro macluumaad waxbarasho dheeraad ah (i) laga turjumo macluumaad waxbarasho oo luuqadaha kale iyo (ii) codsashada qaababka waxbarashada hal ka mid ah. Waxaynu helaynaa kaalmo xoog badan oo labada qaab leh, tusaalahaas oo sameynaya qaababka caadiga ah oo sameynaya shaqooyinka oo dhan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee abuuridda tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo ka gees ah qiyaastii si qudha ah uma sababin kordhiska tababarka. Waxaannu ku qeybqaadanay afartii baasaboor ee Isbanish (EI-Reg), labaad (EI-Okto), afraad (V-Reg) iyo shanaad (V-Okto).', 'sv': 'Denna studie beskriver vårt bidrag till SemEval 2018 Uppgift 1: Påverkan i tweets. Vårt tillvägagångssätt med endast spanska syftade till att visa att det är fördelaktigt att automatiskt generera ytterligare utbildningsdata genom att (i) översätta utbildningsdata från andra språk och (ii) tillämpa en halvövervakad inlärningsmetod. Vi finner ett starkt stöd för båda tillvägagångssätten, där dessa modeller presterar bättre än våra vanliga modeller i alla underaktiviteter. Att skapa en stegvis ensemble av olika modeller i motsats till att bara räkna medelvärden resulterade dock inte i någon ökning av prestanda. Vi placerade oss tvåa (EI-Reg), tvåa (EI-Oc), fjärde (V-Reg) och femte (V-Oc) i de fyra spanska deluppgifter vi deltog i.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய ஆய்வு செம்Eval 2018 பணிக்கு எங்கள் அனுப்புவதை விளக்குகிறது: Tweets-ல் விளைவு. எங்கள் ஸ்பானிஷ் மட்டுமே செயல்பாடுகள் தானாகவே கூடுதல் பயிற்சி தரவை உருவாக்குவதற்கு பயனுள்ளது மற்ற மொழிகளிலிருந்து (i) மொழிமாற்றும் பயிற்சி தகவல் மற் நாம் இரண்டு அணுகுகளுக்கும் வலிமையான ஆதரவை கண்டுபிடிக்கும், அந்த மாதிரிகளுடன், அனைத்து துணை பணிகளிலும் எங் ஆனால், வேறு மாதிரிகளுக்கு எதிராக ஒரு படிப்புவிளக்கமான மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்குவது சராசரி செயல்பாட்டின் அதிகரிப்பு காரணம நாம் நான்கு ஸ்பானிஷ் துணை பணிகளில் பங்கிடப்பட்ட நான்காவது செயல்களில் இரண்டாவது (EI-Reg), இரண்டாவது (EI- Oc), நான்கு (V- Reg) மற்றும் ஐந்தா', 'ur': 'اس مطالعہ میں ہماری سفارش کی توجیت میں اثر ہے۔ ہماری صرف اسپانیایی طریقہ کا مطابق دکھانے کا ارادہ ہے کہ یہ اضافہ تدریس دیٹے کو دوسری زبانوں سے ترجمہ کرتا ہے اور (i i) نصف-supervised سیکھنے کی طریقہ کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ہم دونوں طریقوں کے لئے مضبوط حمایت پاتے ہیں، ان نمڈلوں کے ساتھ جو ہمارے معمولی نمڈلوں کو تمام دفتروں میں انجام دیتے ہیں۔ لیکن مختلف موڈلوں کی ایک سٹیپ پائس پیدا کرنے کی مخالفت کے سوا، صرف متفاوت کے نتیجہ میں اضافہ نہیں ہوئی۔ ہم نے دوسری (EI-Reg), دوسری (EI-Oc), چوتھی (V-Reg) اور پانچویں (V-Oc) کو چار اسپانیایی مضبوطی میں رکھا تھا جن میں ہم شریک تھے.', 'si': 'දැන් අධ්\u200dයානයේ අපේ සෙම්වෙල් 2018 කාර්ය 1 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා: ට්විට් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපේ ස්පැනිස් විතරයි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා ඒක ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා (i) අනිත් භාෂාවයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය දත්ත සි අපි හොයාගන්නේ දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ශක්තිමත් උදව් හොයාගන්න, අපේ සාමාන්\u200dය මොඩේල් එක්ක අපේ සාමාන්\u200dය මො නමුත්, වෙනස් මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක ස්ටෙප්පිස් සිද්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක සිද්ධ වෙන්න පුළ අපි දෙවනිය (EI-reg), දෙවනිය (EI-Oc), 4 (V-reg) සහ 5 (V-Oc) ස්පැනිශ් වලට අපි සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ.', 'uz': "Joriy tahrirchi SemEval 2018 Vazifa 1: Twitterda muammolar. Ispanchaga faqat tilimizni koʻrsatish uchun, bu avtomatik qoʻshimcha trening maʼlumotini (i) boshqa tillardan tarjima qilish maʼlumotlari va (ii) o'rganish usulini qoʻllash uchun foydalanuvchidir. Biz ikkita usullar uchun yordam qoʻllanmiz, hamma vazifalarda oddiy modellarimizni bajarayotgan modellar bilan ishlayapmiz. Lekin, oddiy o'rtacha, boshqa modellarning o'zgarishni o'zgartirish natijasida o'zgarishni oshirishga sabab boʻlmadi. We placed second (EI-Reg), second (EI-Oc), fourth (V-Reg) and fifth (V-Oc) in the four Spanish subtasks we participated in.", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu này mô tả sự chịu trách nhiệm của chúng ta cho SemEvl 208 Task 1: Đặt tác dụng trong Tweet. Phương pháp duy nhất của chúng tôi về Tây Ban Nha nhằm chứng minh rằng nó có lợi khi tự động tạo ra dữ liệu đào tạo bổ sung bằng cách (i) dịch chuyển dữ liệu đào tạo từ các ngôn ngữ khác và (II) áp dụng một phương pháp học được gần giám sát. Chúng tôi tìm được sự ủng hộ mạnh mẽ cho cả hai phương pháp, với những mô hình đó vượt trội các mẫu thông thường bằng mọi phụ đề. Tuy nhiên, tạo ra một kết hợp lập trình của các mô hình khác nhau thay vì chỉ là trung bình không có kết quả tăng suất. Chúng tôi đặt thứ hai (ei-Reg), thứ hai (ei-Oc), thứ tư (V-Reg) và thứ năm (V-Oc) vào bốn phụ đề Tây Ban Nha mà chúng tôi tham gia.', 'hr': 'U sadašnjem ispitivanju opisuje našu podnošenje zadatku 1. za semiEval 2018: utjecaj na Tweets. Naš jedini španjolski pristup je cilj pokazati da je korisno automatski proizvesti dodatne podatke o obuci s i) prevoditi podatke o obuci iz drugih jezika i ii) primjenjivati metodu učenja polu nadzornog nadzora. Nalazimo jaku podršku obje pristupe, s tim modelima koji su nadmašili naše redovne modele u svim podstavljanjima. Međutim, stvaranje kročnog udara osiguranja različitih modela, suprotno jednostavnom prosječavanju, nije rezultiralo povećanje učinka. Stavili smo drugu (EI-Reg), drugu (EI-Oc), četvrtinu (V-Reg) i petu (V-Oc) u četiri španjolske podatke u kojima smo učestvovali.', 'nl': 'Deze studie beschrijft onze inzending aan SemEval 2018 Taak 1: Affect in Tweets. Onze aanpak alleen Spaans was bedoeld om aan te tonen dat het nuttig is om automatisch aanvullende trainingsgegevens te genereren door (i) trainingsgegevens uit andere talen te vertalen en (ii) een semi-begeleide leermethode toe te passen. We vinden sterke steun voor beide benaderingen, waarbij die modellen onze reguliere modellen in alle subtaken overtreffen. Het creëren van een stapsgewijs ensemble van verschillende modellen in plaats van simpelweg gemiddeld resulteerde echter niet in een toename van de prestaties. We werden tweede (EI-Reg), tweede (EI-Oc), vierde (V-Reg) en vijfde (V-Oc) in de vier Spaanse subtaken waaraan we deelnamen.', 'bg': 'Настоящото проучване описва нашето представяне на задача 1: Въздействие в туитове. Нашият подход, предназначен само за испански език, цели да покаже, че е полезно автоматично да се генерират допълнителни данни за обучение чрез (i) превеждане на данни за обучение от други езици и (ii) прилагане на полунадзорен метод за обучение. Намираме силна подкрепа и за двата подхода, като тези модели надминават нашите редовни модели във всички подзадачи. Въпреки това, създаването на поетапен ансамбъл от различни модели, за разлика от просто осредняване, не доведе до увеличаване на производителността. Поставихме второ (EI-Reg), второ (EI-Oc), четвърто (V-Reg) и пето (V-Oc) в четирите испански подзадачи, в които участвахме.', 'da': 'Denne undersøgelse beskriver vores indsendelse til SemEval 2018 Opgave 1: Påvirkning i tweets. Vores tilgang til kun spansk sigtede mod at påvise, at det er gavnligt automatisk at generere yderligere træningsdata ved at (i) oversætte træningsdata fra andre sprog og (ii) anvende en semi-overvåget læringsmetode. Vi finder stærk støtte til begge tilgange, hvor disse modeller overgår vores almindelige modeller i alle underopgaver. Men at skabe et trinvist ensemble af forskellige modeller i modsætning til simpel gennemsnitsberegning resulterede ikke i en stigning i ydeevnen. Vi placerede andenpladsen (EI-Reg), andenpladsen (EI-Oc), fjerde (V-Reg) og femte (V-Oc) i de fire spanske underopgaver, vi deltog i.', 'de': 'Die vorliegende Studie beschreibt unsere Einreichung an SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets. Unser ausschließlich spanischer Ansatz zielte darauf ab, zu zeigen, dass es vorteilhaft ist, automatisch zusätzliche Trainingsdaten zu generieren, indem (i) Trainingsdaten aus anderen Sprachen übersetzt und (ii) eine semi-überwachte Lernmethode angewendet wird. Wir finden starke Unterstützung für beide Ansätze, wobei diese Modelle unsere regulären Modelle in allen Teilaufgaben übertreffen. Die Erstellung eines schrittweisen Ensembles verschiedener Modelle im Gegensatz zur einfachen Mittelung führte jedoch nicht zu einer Leistungssteigerung. Wir wurden Zweiter (EI-Reg), Zweiter (EI-Oc), Vierter (V-Reg) und Fünfter (V-Oc) in den vier spanischen Teilaufgaben, an denen wir teilgenommen haben.', 'id': 'Studi ini menjelaskan pengiriman kita ke SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets. Pendekatan hanya Spanyol kami bertujuan untuk menunjukkan bahwa itu berguna untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan data pelatihan tambahan dengan (i) menerjemahkan data pelatihan dari bahasa lain dan (ii) menerapkan metode pelatihan semi-supervised. Kami menemukan dukungan yang kuat untuk kedua pendekatan, dengan model-model tersebut melebihi model biasa kita dalam semua subtasks. Namun, menciptakan sebuah ensemble langkah-langkah dari model yang berbeda selain dari purata tidak menyebabkan peningkatan prestasi. We placed second (EI-Reg), second (EI-Oc), fourth (V-Reg) and fifth (V-Oc) in the four Spanish subtasks we participated in.', 'tr': "Häzirki araşdyrma biziň 2018-nji SemEval Görevimize 1-nji Görevimizi: Tweets'de janlaşdyrylygymyzy tassyklaýar. Biziň diňe Ispanýolça golaýamyz, özümiziň (i) başga dillerden öwrenme maglumatyny terjime etmegimiz we (ii) ýarym-gözlemeli öwrenme yöntemi üçin ýeterlik ýüzedir diýip görkezmäge maksady berilýär. Her iki nusga üçin güýçli golaýy tapýarys, bu nusgalar hemme nusgalarymyzdan üstün çykýarlar. Yöne ýöne, diňe üýtgetmek üçin farklı nusgalaryň üýtgetmegine görä bir öwürme sahypasyny bejermek ýok. Biz ikinji (EI-Reg), ikinji (EI-Oc), dördünji (V-Reg) we beşinji", 'ko': '본 연구는 우리가 SemEval 2018 임무 1: 트윗에 제출한 영향에 대해 설명한다.우리의 순수한 스페인어 방법은 (i)를 통해 다른 언어의 교육 데이터를 번역하고 (ii) 반감독 학습 방법을 응용하여 추가 교육 데이터를 자동으로 생성하는 것이 유익하다는 것을 증명하는 데 목적을 둔다.우리는 이 두 가지 방법이 모두 강력한 지지를 얻었는데, 이 모델들은 모든 하위 임무에서 일반적인 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.그러나 서로 다른 모델을 만드는 점차적인 집적은 단순히 평균적이지 않고 성능을 향상시키지 못했다.우리가 참여한 네 개의 스페인어 하위 임무 중 2위(EI-Reg), 2위(EI-Oc), 4위(V-reg), 5위(V-Oc)에 올랐다.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa sasa unaelezea ujumbe wetu wa SemEval 2018 kazi 1: Inaathiri kwenye twita. Hatua yetu ya Kihispania pekee inayolenga kuonyesha kuwa ni faida ya kutengeneza taarifa za mafunzo zaidi kwa wenyewe na (i) kutafsiri data za mafunzo kutoka lugha nyingine na (ii) kutumia njia ya kujifunza kwa njia inayofuatiliwa na sekunde. Tunapata msaada mkubwa wa namna zote mbili, pamoja na mifano hiyo inayoonyesha mifano yetu ya kawaida katika kazi zote. Hata hivyo, kutengeneza mifano tofauti tofauti na kuongezeka kwa wastani hakusababisha kuongezeka kwa utendaji. Tulifanya kazi ya pili (EI-Reg), ya pili (EI-Oct), ya nne (V-Reg) na ya tano (V-Oct) katika kazi nne za Kihispania tulizoshiriki.', 'fa': 'مطالعه در حال حاضر تسلیم کردن ما به تابع نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ توضیح می\u200cدهد: اثر در Tweets. تنها دستور اسپانیایی ما را هدف می\u200cدهد تا نشان دهیم که آن سودمند است که داده\u200cهای آموزش اضافه\u200cای را توسط (i) ترجمه داده\u200cهای آموزش از زبان\u200cهای دیگر تولید کنیم و (ii) که روش آموزش نیمه مراقبت می\u200cکند. ما پشتیبانی قوی برای هر دو دسترسی پیدا می\u200cکنیم، با این مدل\u200cها که مدل\u200cهای معمولی ما را در همه\u200cی زیر دسترسی انجام می\u200cدهند. با این حال، ایجاد یک نقطه قدم از مدل مختلف در مقابل متوسط ساده، نتیجه افزایش عملکرد را نداشت. ما دومین (EI-Reg), دومین (EI-Oc), چهارمین (V-Reg) و پنجمین (V-Oc) را در چهار زیر سپانیایی اسپانیایی که در آن شرکت کردیم قرار دادیم.', 'af': "Die huidige studie beskrywe ons onderwerp tot SemEval 2018 Taak 1: Afteken in Tweets. Ons slegs Spaanse toegang het bedoel om te bevestig dat dit voordeel is om outomatiese oorwinning data te genereer deur (i) die oorwinning data van ander tale te vertaling en (ii) die toepassing van 'n semi-ondersoekte leermeetode te doen. Ons vind sterk ondersteuning vir beide toegang, met daardie modele wat ons gewone modele uitvoer in alle ondersteunings. Maar die skep van 'n stapwys-ensembleem van verskillende modele teen eenvoudige gemiddelde het nie gevaal in 'n vergroting in prestasie nie. Ons het tweede (EI-Reg), tweede (EI-Oc), vierde (V-Reg) en vyfde (V-Oc) in die vier Spaanse subtaske in wat ons gedeel het.", 'am': 'የአሁኑ ትምህርት ለሴmEval 2018 ስራ 1 ለማድረግ አዋጅ ይናገራል፡፡ የስፓኒሽ ብቻ ልማድ ማግኘታችንን (i) ከሌሎች ቋንቋዎች እና (ii) የተጠበቀው የትምህርት ማድረግ ማድረግ ማድረግ ማግኘት ማድረግ በአስማማቸኛ ማድረግ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በሁለቱ ደረጃዎች ላይ የጠነከረን ድጋፍ እናገኛለን፤ እነዚህም ምሳሌዎች በሁሉም ደብዳቤዎችን የሚያሳልፉትን ምሳሌዎች እናገኛለን፡፡ ነገር ግን ተቃውሞ ተቃውሞ የተለየ የልዩ ዓይነቶች አካባቢ ምሳሌ መፍጠር በጥያቄ እየጨመረ ጥያቄ አካሄደ፡፡ ሁለተኛውን (EI-Reg)፣ ሁለተኛውን (EI-Oc)፣ አራተኛውን (V-Reg) እና አምስተኛውን (V-Ock) በአራቱ ስፓኒሽ ደብዳቤዎች ውስጥ ተካፈልን።', 'hy': 'Այս ուսումնասիրությունը նկարագրում է մեր ներկայացումը 2018 թվականի «ՍեմԷվալ 2018» առաջին հանձնարարությանը՝ Թվիթերի ազդեցությունը: Մեր միակ իսպաներեն մոտեցումը նպատակով էր ապացուցել, որ օգտակար է ավտոմատ ստեղծել ավելացյալ ուսուցման տվյալներ՝ i) թարգմանելով ուսուցման տվյալները այլ լեզուներից և II) կիսակառավարվող ուսուցման մեթոդ: Մենք կարևոր աջակցություն ենք գտնում երկու մոտեցումների համար, որոնք գերազանցում են մեր սովորական մոդելները բոլոր ենթահարցերում: Այնուամենայնիվ, տարբեր մոդելների աստիճանաբար ստեղծելը, ի հակառակ ընդհանուր չափի, արդյունքում արտադրողության աճ չէր: Մենք տեղադրեցինք երկրորդը (Էլ-Ռեգ), երկրորդը (Էլ-Օկտեմբեր), չորրորդը (Վ-Ռեգ) և հինգերորդը (Վ-Օկտեմբեր) այն չորս իսպանական ենթաթերթերում, որտեղ մասնակցեցինք:', 'sq': 'Studimi i tanishëm përshkruan paraqitjen tonë në SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets. Our Spanish-only approach aimed to demonstrate that it is beneficial to automatically generate additional training data by (i) translating training data from other languages and (ii) applying a semi-supervised learning method.  Ne gjejmë mbështetje të fortë për të dy qasjet, me këto modele që tejkalojnë modelet tona të rregullta në të gjitha nënpyetjet. Megjithatë, krijimi pas hapi i një grupi modelesh të ndryshëm në vend të thjeshtë mesatarisë nuk rezultoi në një rritje në performancë. Ne vendosëm të dytën (EI-Reg), të dytën (EI-Oc), të katërtin (V-Reg) dhe të pestën (V-Oc) në katër nëndetyrat spanjolle në të cilat morëm pjesë.', 'az': 'Ňěimdiki t…ôhsil bizim 2018-ci SemEval Task 1-in …ô t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôyimizi t…ôsdiql…ôyir: T√∂vidl…ôrd…ô m√ľsib…ôt edir. Bizim ńįspanyol t…ôr…ôfind…ôn yalnńĪz t…ôhsil etdiyimiz t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ baŇüqa dill…ôrd…ôn t…ôhsil etm…ôk v…ô i i) yarńĪ-g√∂zl…ôyirli √∂yr…ônm…ô metodumu il…ô avtomatik olaraq t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ t…ôhsil etm…ôk faydalandńĪr. Biz h…ôr ikimizin yaxńĪnlńĪqlarńĪna √ßox q√ľvv…ôtli d…ôst…ôk tapńĪrńĪq, bu modell…ôr h…ômiŇü…ô modell…ôrimizi h…ôr Ňüeyd…ôn √ľst√ľn tutar. Halbuki, t…ôp…ôr…ôstl…ôrin m√ľxt…ôlif modell…ôrin m√ľqabilind…ô t…ôp…ôr…ôstl…ôrini yaratmaq √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôp…ôr…ôstl…ôrin t…ôp…ôr…ôstl…ôrini t…ôŇükil etm…ôy…ô m√ľv…ôff…ôq etm…ôdi. Biz ikinci (EI-Reg), ikinci (EI-Oc), d√∂rd√ľnc√ľ (V-Reg) v…ô beŇüinci (V-Oc) ńįspanyolca iŇütirak etdik.', 'bn': 'বর্তমান গবেষণা সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজের প্রতি আমাদের প্রতিষ্ঠান বর্ণনা করছে: টুইটারে প্রভাবিত। আমাদের স্প্যানিশ-শুধুমাত্র প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদর্শনের উদ্দেশ্যে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে আরো প্রশিক্ষণ তথ্য তৈরি করা সুবিধা (I) অন্যান্য ভ আমরা দুটো প্রতিক্রিয়ার জন্য শক্তিশালী সমর্থন পেয়েছি, যারা আমাদের নিয়মিত মডেল প্রদর্শন করছে সকল সাবটাকাজের মধ্ তবে গড়ে যাওয়ার বিরুদ্ধে বিভিন্ন মডেলের একটি পদক্ষেপ সৃষ্টি করা হয়েছে তার ফলে প্রদর্শনের বৃদ্ধি হয় নি। আমরা দ্বিতীয় (EI-Reg), দ্বিতীয় (EI-Oct), চতুর্থ (V-Reg) এবং চারজন স্প্যানিশ সাবটাকাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছি।', 'cs': 'Tato studie popisuje náš příspěvek k SemEvalu 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets. Náš přístup pouze ve španělštině měl za cíl ukázat, že je výhodné automaticky generovat další údaje o školení (i) překladem dat z jiných jazyků a (ii) použitím metody semi-supervised learning. Najdeme silnou podporu pro oba přístupy, přičemž tyto modely překonávají naše běžné modely ve všech dílčích úkolech. Vytvoření postupného souboru různých modelů na rozdíl od jednoduchého průměrování však nevedlo ke zvýšení výkonu. Ve čtyřech španělských podúkolech jsme se zúčastnili druhého (EI-Reg), druhého (EI-Oc), čtvrtého (V-Reg) a pátého (V-Oc).', 'et': 'Käesolev uuring kirjeldab meie esitamist SemEval 2018 ülesandele 1: mõju tweetides. Meie ainult hispaania keelelise lähenemisviisi eesmärk oli näidata, et on kasulik automaatselt luua täiendavaid koolitusandmeid (i) tõlkida koolitusandmeid teistest keeltest ja (ii) rakendada pooljuhitatud õppemeetodit. Leiame tugevat toetust mõlemale lähenemisviisile, sest need mudelid on kõigis alamülesannetes meie tavamudelitest paremad. Erinevate mudelite järkjärgulise komplekti loomine, mitte lihtsalt keskmise arvutamise asemel, ei toonud siiski kaasa jõudluse suurenemist. Neljas Hispaania alamülesandes, milles osalesime, asetasime teise (EI-Reg), teise (EI-Oc), neljanda (V-Reg) ja viienda (V-Oc).', 'ca': "L'estudi descriu la nostra presentació a SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets. Our Spanish-only approach aimed to demonstrate that it is beneficial to automatically generate additional training data by (i) translating training data from other languages and (ii) applying a semi-supervised learning method.  Trobem fort suport a ambdós enfocaments, amb aquests models que superen els nostres models habituals en totes les subtaskes. No obstant això, crear un conjunt gradual de diferents models en comptes d'una mitjana no va resultar en un augment del rendiment. Vam posar el segon (EI-Reg), el segon (EI-Oc), el quart (V-Reg) i el quint (V-Oc) en les quatre subtaskes espanyoles en les que vam participar.", 'bs': 'U sadašnjoj studiji opisuje naše podnošenje zadatku 1. za semiEval 2018: utjecaj na Tweets. Naš jedini španjolski pristup cilj je pokazati da je korisno automatski proizvesti dodatne podatke obuke prema (i) prevoditi podatke obuke iz drugih jezika i ii) primjenjivati metodu učenja polu nadzornog nadzora. Nalazimo jaku podršku obje pristupe, s tim modelima koji su nadmašili naše redovne modele u svim podrškama. Međutim, stvaranje kročnog izlaza u različitim modelima, suprotno jednostavnom prosječavanju, nije rezultiralo povećanje učinka. Stavili smo drugu (EI-Reg), drugu (EI-Oc), četvrtinu (V-Reg) i petu (V-Oc) u četiri španjolske podatke u koje smo učestvovali.', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa kuvataan osallistumismme SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets -ohjelmaan. Ainoastaan espanjankielisen lähestymistapamme tavoitteena oli osoittaa, että on hyödyllistä luoda automaattisesti lisätietoja koulutustiedoista (i) kääntämällä koulutustietoja muilta kieliltä ja (ii) soveltamalla puoliohjattua oppimismenetelmää. Tuemme vahvasti molempia lähestymistapoja, sillä nämä mallit suoriutuvat tavallisista malleistamme kaikissa alitehtävissä. Eri mallien vaiheittaisen kokonaisuuden luominen pelkän keskiarvon sijaan ei kuitenkaan lisännyt suorituskykyä. Sijoitimme toiseksi (EI-Reg), toiseksi (EI-Oc), neljänneksi (V-Reg) ja viidenneksi (V-Oc) neljässä espanjalaisessa alatehtävässä, joihin osallistuimme.', 'jv': 'Iki ujaran kanggo ngerwih urip nggambar tarjamahan kanggo Kemerdekaan Samsul 1: AfEffect in Two. Panjenengan langkung wigatinipun Panjenengan langkung wigatining tentang nggawe yen nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe data sithik tambah (i) nggawe data sithik karo perusahaan langkung wigatinipun lan (i i) nggawe sistem sing wis dipoleh-sistem. Awak dhéwé énkedah luwih dumadhi kanggo kalagayané, lan model kuwi iso nggawe model sing ditambah kanggo kalawartané. Nanging, nggawe sistem aturan tapir-tapi sing gawe model gawe ngupakan bisa nguasai iki dadi supoyo kuwi cah-cah dumadhi sing ora bisa ngelarane efes. Awak dhéwé wis nambah tanggal (E I-Reg), tanggal (E I-Ok), tuanjakan (V-Reg) lan sampeyan nganggo lima (V-Ok) lan nganggo dolanan nganggo dolanan sing itlanjut Spanish.', 'sk': 'V tej študiji je opisana naša predložitev na nalogo 1 SemEval 2018: Vpliv v tweets. Naš samošpanski pristop je bil namenjen dokazati, da je koristno samodejno ustvarjanje dodatnih podatkov o usposabljanju z (i) prevajanjem podatkov o usposabljanju iz drugih jezikov in (ii) uporabo polnadzorovane metode učenja. Za oba pristopa najdemo močno podporo, saj ti modeli v vseh podnalogah presegajo naše običajne modele. Vendar pa ustvarjanje postopkovnega ansambla različnih modelov v nasprotju s preprostim povprečjem ni povzročilo povečanja zmogljivosti. V štirih španskih podnalogah, v katerih smo sodelovali, smo uvrstili drugo (EI-Reg), drugo (EI-Oc), četrto (V-Reg) in peto (V-Oc).', 'ha': 'Ana faɗa matsayinmu zuwa Semeval 2018 Tanin 1: Affect in Twitter. Tsarakanmu na Isspanish kawai don ya yi nufin ya nuna cewa ya fi amfani da a ƙi ƙira data masu ƙaranci da (i) tarjima data na fassarwa daga harshen wasu harshen, da (ii) ya sami wata hanyon lõkaci wanda aka tsare na ƙaranci. Tuna sãmu mataimaki mai ƙarfi ga duk hanyõyin su, da waɗannan misãlai da ke samar misalinmu masu daidai a cikin dukkan aikin. A lokacin da, ka ƙiƙiri wani emboli mai dabam-dabam na misãlai dabam-dabam, da motsi mai sauri, ba ya ƙara wani mai gabatar da aikin ba. Kuma Muka sanya ta a cikin aikin Isbaniya huɗu (EI-Reg), na biyu (EI-okt), a cikin rubu (V-Reg) da na fianci.', 'he': 'המחקר הנוכחי מתאר את ההעברה שלנו לסימוול 2018 משימה 1: הגישה הספרדית היחידה שלנו היתה המטרה להוכיח שהיא מועילה ליצור אוטומטית נתונים אימונים נוספים על ידי (i) תרגום נתונים אימונים משפות אחרות (ii) שיטת לימוד חצי מושגת. אנחנו מוצאים תמיכה חזקה לשני הגישות, עם הדוגמנים האלה יוצאים מעל הדוגמנים הרגילים שלנו בכל תחתיות. עם זאת, יצירת אסמבל שלב של דוגמנים שונים בניגוד לממוצע פשוט לא הובילה לגידול ביצועים. שמנו את השני (EI-Reg), השני (EI-Oc), הרביעי (V-Reg) ו-חמישי (V-Oc) בארבע השאלות הספרדיות שבהן השתתפנו.', 'bo': 'འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོན་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་འཇུག་སྡོད་པ་༡： ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རྩ་བའི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། མིག ང་ཚོས་ཤུགས་པ་གཉིས་པ་(EI-Reg)གཉིས་པ་(EI-Oc)བཞི་པ་(V-Reg) དང་ལྔ་པ་(V-Oc)མཉམ་དུ་སྐད་མཉམ་དུ་སྐད་ཡིན་འདུག'}
{'en': 'ISCLAB at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'ar': 'ISCLAB في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: UIR-Miner للتأثير في التغريدات', 'es': 'ISCLAB en Semeval-2018 Tarea 1: UIR-Miner para Affect in Tweets', 'pt': 'ISCLAB no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'fr': 'ISCLAB au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 1\xa0: UIR-Miner pour Affect dans les Tweets', 'ja': 'ISCLAB at SemEval -2018 Task 1: UIR - Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'zh': 'ISCLABĺś¨SemEval-2018ĺŠˇ1:ćŽ¨ć–‡äą‹UIRçźżĺ·Ą', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर ISCLAB: Tweets में प्रभाव के लिए UIR-खनिक', 'ru': 'ISCLAB на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: UIR-Miner для воздействия в твитах', 'ga': 'ISCLAB ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'ka': 'ISCLAB SemEval-2018 დავალება 1: UIR-Miner for Effects in Tweets', 'hu': 'ISCLAB a SemEval-2018 feladat 1: UIR-Miner az érintettségért a tweetekben', 'el': 'ISCLAB στο SemEval-2018 Εργασία 1: Ορυχεία για την Επίδραση στα Τουίτερ', 'it': "ISCLAB a SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner per l'Affetto nei Tweet", 'lt': 'ISCLAB SemEval-2018 1 užduotis: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'kk': 'ISCLAB жарым- 2018 тапсырмасы 1: UIR- Miner for Effects in Tweets', 'mk': 'ISCLAB на SemEval-2018 задача 1: UIR-Miner for Affect on Tweets', 'mt': 'ISCLAB f’SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1: ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള UIR-Miner', 'mn': 'ISCLAB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Effect in Tweets', 'no': 'ISCLAB ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: UIR-Miner for effekt i tweets', 'pl': 'ISCLAB na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'ro': 'ISCLAB la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: UIR-Miner pentru Afect în Tweets', 'sr': 'ISCLAB na semiEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Effects in Tweets', 'si': 'ISCLAB සම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 1: UIR-මයිනර් ට්විට්ස් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්.', 'ms': 'ISCLAB di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் ISCLAB 1: Tweets ல் விளைவுகளுக்கான UIR- Miner', 'so': 'ISCLAB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'sv': 'ISCLAB på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: UIR-Miner för påverkan i tweets', 'ur': 'ISCLAB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Effects in Tweets', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Comment=ISTIB tại SemEvl-208 Task 1: HUR-Miner for affect in Tweet', 'da': 'ISCLAB på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: UIR-Miner til påvirkning i tweets', 'hr': 'ISCLAB na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: UIR-Miner for Effect in Tweets', 'nl': 'ISCLAB op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: UIR-Miner voor Affect in Tweets', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Минер за влияние в туитове', 'id': 'ISCLAB di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'ko': 'ISCLAB가SemEval-2018에서의 작업1: UIR Miner의 트윗에 미친 영향', 'de': 'ISCLAB auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: UIR-Miner für Affekt in Tweets', 'sw': 'ISCLAB katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Miongoni ya UIR kwa ajili ya Affecti kwenye twita', 'af': 'Isklab by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: UIR-Miner vir Affect in Tweets', 'tr': 'ISCLAB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'sq': 'ISCLAB në SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'az': 'ISCLAB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Effect in Tweets', 'am': 'ስራ 1: UIR-Miner for impact on Twitter', 'fa': 'ISCLAB در ماموریت ۱: UIR-Miner for Effects in Tweets', 'hy': 'ISCOAB-ը, 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ"-ի 1. հանձնարարությունը. UIT-Miner for Աֆֆեկտ Թվիթերում', 'bs': 'ISCLAB na semiEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Effect in Tweets', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের আইসিলাব: টুইটে প্রভাবিত UIR-মাইনার', 'cs': 'ISCLAB na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'ca': 'ISCLAB a SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'et': 'ISCLAB SemEval-2018 ülesandel 1: UIR-Miner mõju jaoks tweetides', 'fi': 'ISCLAB SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'jv': 'IsCLIB nang semi-2008 task 1: user-Miner for AfEffectt in Two', 'sk': 'ISCLAB na SemEval-2018 naloga 1: UIR-Miner za vpliv v tweets', 'ha': 'Page size', 'he': 'ISCLAB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets', 'bo': 'ISCLAB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: UIR-Miner for Affect in Tweets'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a UIR-Miner system for emotion and sentiment analysis evaluation in Twitter in SemEval 2018. Our system consists of three main modules : preprocessing module, stacking module to solve the intensity prediction of emotion and sentiment, LSTM network module to solve multi-label classification, and the hierarchical attention network module for solving emotion and sentiment classification problem. According to the metrics of SemEval 2018, our system gets the final scores of 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708, and 0.408 on 5 subtasks, respectively.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نظام UIR-Miner لتقييم تحليل العواطف والمشاعر في Twitter في SemEval 2018. يتكون نظامنا من ثلاث وحدات رئيسية: وحدة المعالجة المسبقة ، وحدة التكديس لحل تنبؤ شدة العاطفة والمشاعر ، وحدة شبكة LSTM لحل متعدد تصنيف الملصق ، ووحدة شبكة الاهتمام الهرمي لحل مشكلة تصنيف المشاعر والمشاعر. وفقًا لمقاييس SemEval 2018 ، يحصل نظامنا على الدرجات النهائية 0.636 و 0.531 و 0.731 و 0.708 و 0.408 في 5 مهام فرعية على التوالي.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um sistema UIR-Miner para avaliação de análise de emoção e sentimento no Twitter no SemEval 2018. Nosso sistema é composto por três módulos principais: módulo de pré-processamento, módulo de empilhamento para resolver a previsão de intensidade de emoção e sentimento, módulo de rede LSTM para resolver multi- classificação de rótulos e o módulo de rede de atenção hierárquica para resolver o problema de classificação de emoções e sentimentos. De acordo com as métricas do SemEval 2018, nosso sistema obtém as pontuações finais de 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 e 0,408 em 5 subtarefas, respectivamente.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un sistema UIR-Miner para la evaluación del análisis de emociones y sentimientos en Twitter en SemEval 2018. Nuestro sistema consta de tres módulos principales: módulo de preprocesamiento, módulo de apilamiento para resolver la predicción de la intensidad de la emoción y el sentimiento, módulo de red LSTM para resolver la clasificación de múltiples etiquetas y el módulo de red de atención jerárquica para resolver el problema de clasificación de emociones y sentimientos. Según las métricas de SemEval 2018, nuestro sistema obtiene las puntuaciones finales de 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 y 0.408 en 5 subtareas, respectivamente.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un système UIR-Miner pour l'évaluation des émotions et des sentiments sur Twitter dans SemEval 2018. Notre système se compose de trois modules principaux\xa0: un module de prétraitement, un module d'empilage pour résoudre la prédiction d'intensité de l'émotion et du sentiment, le module de réseau LSTM pour résoudre la classification multi-étiquettes et le module de réseau d'attention hiérarchique pour résoudre le problème de classification des émotions et des sentiments. Selon les métriques de SemEval 2018, notre système obtient les scores finaux de 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 et 0,408 sur 5 sous-tâches, respectivement.", 'ja': '本稿では、2018年のTwitterにおける感情・感情分析評価のためのUIR - Minerシステムについて紹介する。私たちのシステムは、感情と感情の強度予測を解決する前処理モジュール、マルチラベル分類を解決するLSTMネットワークモジュール、感情と感情の分類問題を解決する階層的注意ネットワークモジュールの3つの主要なモジュールで構成されています。SemEval 2018の指標によると、システムは5つのサブタスクでそれぞれ0.636、0.531、0.731、0.708、0.408の最終スコアを取得します。', 'zh': '本文于SemEval 2018中引一Twitter情情析估UIR-Miner统。 三要模块:预处理模块情度数模块,多标分LSTM网络模块,情情分网络模块。 以SemEval 2018之指标,吾属5任得分分为0.636,0.5310.7310.731,0.7080.408。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2018 में ट्विटर में भावना और भावना विश्लेषण मूल्यांकन के लिए एक UIR-Miner प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करता है। हमारे सिस्टम में तीन मुख्य मॉड्यूल होते हैं: प्रीप्रोसेसिंग मॉड्यूल, भावना और भावना की तीव्रता की भविष्यवाणी को हल करने के लिए स्टैकिंग मॉड्यूल, बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण को हल करने के लिए एलएसटीएम नेटवर्क मॉड्यूल, और भावना और भावना वर्गीकरण समस्या को हल करने के लिए पदानुक्रमित ध्यान नेटवर्क मॉड्यूल। SemEval 2018 के मैट्रिक्स के अनुसार, हमारे सिस्टम को क्रमशः 5 उप-कार्यों पर 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 और 0.408 का अंतिम स्कोर मिलता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена система UIR-Miner для оценки эмоций и анализа настроений в Twitter в SemEval 2018. Наша система состоит из трех основных модулей: модуль предварительной обработки, модуль укладки для решения прогноза интенсивности эмоций и настроений, сетевой модуль LSTM для решения многоуровневой классификации и сетевой модуль иерархического внимания для решения проблемы классификации эмоций и настроений. Согласно метрикам SemEval 2018, наша система получает итоговые баллы 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 и 0,408 по 5 подзадачам соответственно.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo córas UIR-Miner i láthair le haghaidh meastóireachta anailíse mothúcháin agus meon i Twitter i SemEval 2018. Tá ár gcóras comhdhéanta de thrí phríomh-mhodúl: modúl réamhphróiseála, modúl cruachta chun tuar déine na mothúchán agus na meon a réiteach, modúl líonra LSTM a réiteach il-. aicmiú lipéad, agus an modúl líonra aird ordlathach chun fadhb aicmithe mothúcháin agus meon a réiteach. De réir mhéadracht SemEval 2018, faigheann ár gcóras na scóir deiridh de 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708, agus 0.408 ar 5 fhothasc, faoi seach.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს UIR-მინერის სისტემა ემოციონებისა და სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის Twitter-ში SemEval 2018-ში. ჩვენი სისტემა სამი მნიშვნელოვანი მოდულის შექმნა: პრეპროცესი მოდულია, მოდულია მოდულია, ემოცია და სენტიმენტის ინტენსტიური წინტერესტის წინტერესტის წინტერესტის წინტერესტის წინტერესტის წინტერესტის წინტერესტის გადა 2018 წლის SemEval-ის მეტრიკის მიხედვით, ჩვენი სისტემა მიიღება 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 და 0.408 წლის მიხედვით 5 წლის მიხედვით.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα σύστημα για την αξιολόγηση συναισθημάτων και συναισθημάτων στο Twitter στο SemEval 2018. Το σύστημά μας αποτελείται από τρεις κύριες ενότητες: ενότητα προεπεξεργασίας, ενότητα στοίβαξης για να λύσει την πρόβλεψη έντασης του συναισθήματος και του συναισθήματος, ενότητα δικτύων για να λύσει την ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών ετικετών, και η ιεραρχική ενότητα δικτύων προσοχής για την επίλυση του προβλήματος ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων και συναισθημάτων. Σύμφωνα με τις μετρήσεις του το σύστημά μας λαμβάνει τις τελικές βαθμολογίες 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 και 0.408 σε πέντε δευτερεύουσες εργασίες αντίστοιχα.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az UIR-Miner rendszert az érzelmek és érzelmek elemzésére a Twitteren a SemEval 2018-ban. Rendszerünk három fő modulból áll: előfeldolgozó modulból, halmozó modulból áll az érzelmek és érzelmek intenzitás előrejelzésének megoldására, LSTM hálózati modulból a multi-label osztályozás megoldására, valamint a hierarchikus figyelem hálózati modulból az érzelmek és érzelmek osztályozási problémák megoldására. A SemEval 2018 mutatói szerint rendszerünk 5 részfeladaton 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708, illetve 0,408 végső pontszámot kap.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un sistema UIR-Miner per la valutazione delle emozioni e dei sentimenti su Twitter in SemEval 2018. Il nostro sistema si compone di tre moduli principali: modulo di pre-elaborazione, modulo di impilamento per risolvere la previsione dell'intensità di emozione e sentimento, modulo di rete LSTM per risolvere la classificazione multi-etichetta e il modulo di rete gerarchica di attenzione per risolvere il problema di classificazione dell'emozione e del sentimento. Secondo le metriche di SemEval 2018, il nostro sistema ottiene i punteggi finali di 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 e 0,408 rispettivamente su 5 sottoattività.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiama UIR-Miner sistema emocijų ir sentiment ų analizės vertinimui Twitter 2018 m. SemEval. Mūsų sistemą sudaro trys pagrindiniai moduliai: parengiamojo apdorojimo modulis, surinkimo modulis emocijų ir jausmų intensyvumo prognozėms išspręsti, LSTM tinklo modulis daugiametei klasifikacijai išspręsti ir hierarchinio dėmesio tinklo modulis emocijų ir jausmų klasifikacijos problemoms išspręsti. Remiantis 2018 m. SemEval rodikliais, mūsų sistema gauna galutinius rezultatus atitinkamai 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 ir 0,408 5 paklausų atveju.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылы Твиттерде эмоциялық және сезімдік анализ үшін UIR- минер жүйесін көрсетеді. Біздің жүйеміз үш негізгі модульден тұрады: өзгерту модульі, емоциялар мен сезімдердің қанықтығын шешу үшін, көп белгілерді шешу үшін LSTM желік модульі және эмоциялар мен сезімдердің шешу мәселесін шешу үшін иерархия Біздің жүйеміздің метрикасына сәйкес 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 және 0,408 деген соңғы нөмірлері бар.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan sistem UIR-Miner untuk penilaian analisis emosi dan perasaan di Twitter dalam SemEval 2018. Sistem kita terdiri dari tiga modul utama: modul pemprosesan awal, modul tumpukan untuk menyelesaikan prediksi intensiti emosi dan perasaan, modul rangkaian LSTM untuk menyelesaikan klasifikasi multi-label, dan modul rangkaian perhatian hierarkik untuk menyelesaikan masalah klasifikasi emosi dan perasaan. Menurut metrik SemEval 2018, sistem kita mendapat skor terakhir 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708, dan 0.408 pada 5 subtasks, sama ada.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വികാരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വികാരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും യുഐആര്\u200d-മൈനെര്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം കൊടുക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d മൂന്നു പ്രധാന ഘടകങ്ങളുണ്ട്: മുന്നോട്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഘടകം, വികാരങ്ങളുടെയും വികാരണങ്ങളുടെയും ഉയര്\u200dന്ന പ്രവചനങ്ങളുടെയും പ്രവചനം പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d സ്റ്റ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018-ന്റെ മെറ്റിക്സ് പ്രകാരം നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ അവസാന സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 636, 0. 531, 0. 731, 0. 708, 5 സബ്ട്ടേസില്\u200d 0. 408 കിട്ടും.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta sistema UIR-Miner għall-evalwazzjoni tal-analiżi tal-emozzjonijiet u s-sentimenti fuq Twitter f’SemEval 2018. Is-sistema tagħna tikkonsisti minn tliet moduli ewlenin: modulu ta’ preproċessar, modulu ta’ stacking biex jissolvew it-tbassir tal-intensità tal-emozzjoni u s-sentiment, modulu tan-netwerk LSTM biex jissolvew il-klassifikazzjoni b’ħafna tikketti, u l-modulu tan-netwerk ta’ attenzjoni ġerarkika għas-soluzzjoni tal-problema tal-klassifikazzjoni tal-emozzjoni u s-sentiment. Skont il-metriċi ta’ SemEval 2018, is-sistema tagħna tikseb il-punteġġi finali ta’ 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708, u 0.408 fuq 5 sottomistoqsijiet rispettivament.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2018 оны SemEval-д Твиттерд сэтгэл хөдлөл болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээний UIR-минер системийг харуулдаг. Бидний систем гурван гол модуль бий болсон: аль боловсруулах модуль, сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчтэй тодорхойлолтыг шийдэх, олон загварын хэлбэрийг шийдэх LSTM сүлжээний модуль, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн, мэдрэмжтэй хэлбэрийн асуудлыг шийдэх 2018 оны SemEval-ын метрик хэлбэрээр бидний систем 5 дотор 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708, 5 дотор 0.408 гардаг.', 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува систем на УИР-Минер за проценка на емоциите и сентименталните анализи на Твитер во SemEval 2018 година. Нашиот систем се состои од три главни модули: препроцесирање на модулот, ставање на модулот за решавање на предвидувањето на интензитетот на емоциите и чувствата, модулот на мрежата на ЛСТМ за решавање на мултиетичката класификација, и модулот на мрежата на хиерархиско внимание за решавање на проблем Според метриките на SemEval 2018, нашиот систем добива финални оценки од 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 и 0,408 на 5 потпрашања, односно.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un sistem UIR-Miner pentru evaluarea analizei emoțiilor și sentimentelor pe Twitter în SemEval 2018. Sistemul nostru constă din trei module principale: modul de pre-procesare, modul stivuire pentru rezolvarea predicției intensității emoțiilor și sentimentelor, modulul de rețea LSTM pentru rezolvarea clasificării multi-etichete și modulul de rețea ierarhică pentru rezolvarea problemelor de clasificare a emoțiilor și sentimentelor. Conform măsurătorilor SemEval 2018, sistemul nostru obține scorurile finale de 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 și respectiv 0,408 la 5 subactivități.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja UIR-Miner sistem za procjenu emocija i sentimentalne analize u Twitter u semiEvalu 2018. Naš sistem se sastoji od tri glavnog modula: preobrađivanje modula, postavljanje modula za rešenje intenzivnog predviđanja emocija i osjećanja, LSTM mrežnog modula za rešenje klasifikacije multietiketa, i hijerarhičkog modula mreže za rešenje problema sa klasifikacijom emocija i osjećanja. Prema metrikama semiEvala 2018, naš sistem dobija konačne rezultate od 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 i 0,408 na 5 podataka.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුවේ UIR-මයිනර් පද්ධතියක් පෙන්වනවා දැනගැනීම සහ විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයක් ට්විටර් වල සෙම්වෙල් 2018 ව අපේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරධාන මොඩියුල් තුනක් තියෙන්නේ: ප්\u200dරධාන මොඩියුල්, ස්ටැක් මොඩියුල්, හැඟීම සහ හැඟීම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසිද්ධ කරන්න, LSTM ජාල මොඩියුල් ව අපේ පද්ධතිය 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708, හා 0.408 අන්තිම පද්ධතිය අන්තිම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit UIR-Miner-systemet for evaluering av emosjonar og sentimentanalyser i Twitter i semiEval 2018. Sistemet vårt inneheld tre hovudmodular: førehandsamingsmodul, stakkemodul for å løysa intensitetsforhåndsvising av emosjon og sentiment, LSTM- nettverksmodul for å løysa klassifikasjon av fleire merkelapper, og hierarkisk oppmerksomhet- nettverksmodul for å løysa problem med emosjon og sentimentklassifikasjon. Følgjande metrikane for semiEval 2018 får systemet vårt endelige poeng med 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 og 0,408 på 5 subtaskar.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono system UIR-Miner do oceny emocji i sentymentów w Twitterze w SemEval 2018. Nasz system składa się z trzech głównych modułów: modułu przetwarzania wstępnego, modułu układania w stosy w celu rozwiązania przewidywania intensywności emocji i sentymentów, modułu sieciowego LSTM do rozwiązania klasyfikacji wieloznakowych oraz hierarchicznego modułu sieci uwagi do rozwiązywania problemu klasyfikacji emocji i sentymentów. Według wskaźników SemEval 2018 nasz system otrzymuje odpowiednio wyniki końcowe 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 i 0.408 na 5 podzadaniach.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa laga keenaa nidaam UIR-Miner oo loo qorayo qiimeynta xisaabta iyo maandooriyaha ee Twitterka ee SemEval 2018. Isticmaddeena waxaa ka mid ah saddex noocyo oo muhiim ah: noocyada ka baaraandegista, xajiska noocyada si aad u xallisid wax ka sii daabacdo xisaabta iyo fikrada, noocyada shabakadda LSTM si ay u xalaato fasixiga farsamada badan, iyo noocyada shabakadda ee hierarchical attention si ay u xalliso dhibaatada kalluumeynta iyo kalluumeynta. Sida uu ku qoran metricooyinka SemEval 2018, nidaamkayaga wuxuu u helaa qiyaastii ugu dambeeya scorada 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 iyo 0.408 shabakada 5.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar ett UIR-Miner-system för utvärdering av känslor och känslor i Twitter i SemEval 2018. Vårt system består av tre huvudmoduler: förbehandling modul, stapling modul för att lösa intensitetsförutsägelse av känslor och känslor, LSTM nätverksmodul för att lösa multi-label klassificering och hierarkisk uppmärksamhet nätverksmodul för att lösa känslor och sentiment klassificering problem. Enligt mätvärdena för SemEval 2018 får vårt system slutpoäng på 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 och 0,408 på 5 underaktiviteter.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் உணர்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு ஒரு UIR- Miner அமைப்பை வழங்குகிறது செம்வால் 2018-ல் தொடர எங்கள் அமைப்பு மூன்று முக்கிய கூறுகளில் உள்ளது: முன்செயல்படுத்தல் கூறு, உணர்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு மற்றும் தனிப்படுத்தல் கூற்றை தீர்மானிக்க முடியும் முன்செயல்படுத்தல் கூறு, பல வகுப்புகளை த SemEval 2018ன் மெட்ரிக்களை பொருத்து, எங்கள் கணினியின் முடிவு மதிப்பு 0. 636, 0. 531, 0. 731, 0. 708 மற்றும் 5 துணை பணிகளில் 0. 408 கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'This paper presents a UIR-Miner system for emotion and sentiment analysis evaluation in Twitter in SemEval 2018. ہمارا سیستم تین اصلی موڈولوں میں سے ہے: پیش پرسس میڈولی، سیٹک میڈولی، احساسات اور احساسات کی تنگی کی پیش بینی حل کرنے کے لئے، LSTM نیٹ ورک موڈولی multi-label classification کے لئے حل کرنے کے لئے، اور احساسات اور احساسات کلاسی مسئلہ حل کرنے کے لئے حیراتی توجه نیٹ ورک موڈل. سیم ایولی 2018 کی مٹریک کے مطابق، ہماری سیسٹم کے مطابق 0.636، 0.531، 0.731, 0.708 اور 0.408 کو 5 زیٹسٹسٹسٹسٹ کے مطابق ملتا ہے.', 'uz': 'Bu qogʻoz SemEval 2018 yilda hissiyot va hissiyotni aniqlash uchun UIR-Miner tizimini koʻrsatiladi. Bizning tizimimizda uchta asosiy modullar bor: preprocessing moduli, hissiyot va hissiyotning kuchini aniqlash uchun foydalanuvchi moduli, multi- yorliq darajalashtirish uchun LSTM tarmoq moduli, va hissiyalarni va hissiyalarning muammosini sollash uchun hierarchik foydalanish moduli. SemEval 2018ning metriklari davomida, bizning tizimmiz boshqa 5 vazifalarga 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0. 708 va 0.408 xizmatlarida oxirgi scorlar topadi.', 'vi': 'Bài báo này cung cấp một hệ thống UID-Miner để đánh giá cảm xúc và đa cảm trên Twitter ở SemEvl 208. Hệ thống của chúng ta có ba mô- đun chính: thay đổi mô- đun, xếp mô- đun để giải quyết dự đoán độ mạnh của cảm xúc và cảm xúc, mô- đun mạng LSD để giải quyết phân loại đa nhãn, và mô- đun mạng chú ý cấp bậc cấp cao để giải quyết vấn đề phân loại cảm xúc và cảm xúc. Theo các âm lượng của SemEvl 208, hệ thống của chúng tôi có điểm số cuối của 0.636, 0', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer et UIR-Miner system til følelses- og sentimentalanalysevaluering i Twitter i SemEval 2018. Vores system består af tre hovedmoduler: forbehandling modul, stabling modul til at løse intensitetsforudsigelse af følelser og sentiment, LSTM netværksmodul til at løse multi-label klassificering og det hierarkiske opmærksomhedsnetværksmodul til løsning af følelser og sentiment klassificering problem. Ifølge målene i SemEval 2018 får vores system de endelige scorer på henholdsvis 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 og 0,408 på 5 underopgaver.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een UIR-Miner systeem voor emotie- en sentimentanalyse evaluatie in Twitter in SemEval 2018. Ons systeem bestaat uit drie hoofdmodules: preprocessing module, stapelende module om de intensiteitsvoorspelling van emotie en sentiment op te lossen, LSTM netwerkmodule om multi-label classificatie op te lossen, en de hiërarchische aandacht netwerkmodule voor het oplossen van emotie en sentimentclassificatieprobleem. Volgens de statistieken van SemEval 2018 krijgt ons systeem de eindscores van respectievelijk 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 en 0.408 op vijf subtaken.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt ein UIR-Miner-System zur Emotions- und Sentiment-Analyse in Twitter in SemEval 2018 vor. Unser System besteht aus drei Hauptmodulen: Vorverarbeitungsmodul, Stapelmodul, um die Intensitätsvorhersage von Emotion und Sentiment zu lösen, LSTM Netzwerkmodul, um Multi-Label Klassifizierung zu lösen, und das hierarchische Aufmerksamkeitsnetzmodul zur Lösung von Emotion und Sentiment Klassifikationsproblem. Entsprechend den Metriken von SemEval 2018 erhält unser System die Endwerte von 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 und 0.408 auf fünf Teilaufgaben.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan sistem UIR-Miner untuk evaluasi emosi dan analisis sentimen di Twitter di SemEval 2018. Sistem kami terdiri dari tiga modul utama: modul preproses, modul stacking untuk memecahkan prediksi intensitas emosi dan sentimen, modul jaringan LSTM untuk memecahkan klasifikasi multi-label, dan modul jaringan perhatian hierarkis untuk memecahkan masalah klasifikasi emosi dan sentimen. Menurut metrik SemEval 2018, sistem kita mendapatkan nilai akhir 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708, dan 0,408 pada 5 subtasks, sesuai.', 'ko': '본고는 2018년 SemEval이 트위터에서 정서와 정서 분석 평가를 하는 데 사용된 UIR Miner 시스템을 소개한다.우리 시스템은 세 가지 주요 모듈로 구성되어 있는데 그것이 바로 예처리 모듈, 정서와 정서 강도 예측을 해결하는 중첩 모듈, 다중 라벨 분류를 해결하는 LSTM 네트워크 모듈과 정서와 정서 분류 문제를 해결하는 층별 주의 네트워크 모듈이다.SemEval 2018의 지표에 따르면 우리 시스템의 5개 하위 임무에서의 최종 점수는 각각 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708과 0.408이다.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja UIR-Miner sistem za procjenu emocija i analize osjećaja u Twitter-u u semiEvalu 2018. Naš sustav se sastoji od tri glavnog modula: preobrađivanje modula, stajanje modula za rješavanje intenzitetne predviđanja emocija i osjećaja, LSTM mrežnog modula za rješavanje klasifikacije multietiketa, i hijerarhičkog modula mreže za rješavanje problema sa klasifikacijom emocija i osjećaja. Prema metricima semiEvala 2018, naš sustav dobija konačne rezultate od 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 i 0,408 na 5 podataka.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha mfumo wa UIR-Miner wa hisia na uchambuzi wa hisia kwenye mtandao wa Twita katika SemEval 2018. Mfumo wetu unajumuisha vifaa tatu muhimu: kituo cha upasuaji, kinaweka vifaa ili kutatua utabiri wa kiwango kikubwa wa hisia na hisia, kituo cha mtandao wa LSTM ili kutatua usambazaji wa vifaa vingi, na kifaa cha mitandao ya uangalizi wa kiuchumi kwa kutatua matatizo ya hisia na hisia. Kwa mujibu wa mitindo ya SemEval 2018, mfumo wetu unapata vipimo vya mwisho vya 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708, na 0.408 katika kazi 5.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя система за оценка на емоционалния и сентиментален анализ в Туитър в СемЕвал 2018. Нашата система се състои от три основни модула: предварителен модул, модул за подреждане за решаване на интензивността на емоцията и сантименталността, мрежов модул за решаване на многоетикетна класификация и модул за йерархична мрежа за внимание за решаване на проблем с класификацията на емоциите и сантименталностите. Според показателите на нашата система получава крайни резултати от 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 и 0.408 съответно на 5 подзадачи.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një sistem UIR-Miner për vlerësimin e analizës së emocioneve dhe ndjenjave në Twitter në SemEval 2018. Sistemi ynë përbëhet nga tre module kryesorë: moduli i përgatitjes së procesit, moduli i përgatitjes për të zgjidhur parashikimin e intensitetit të emocioneve dhe ndjenjave, moduli i rrjetit LSTM për të zgjidhur klasifikimin me shumë etiketa dhe moduli i rrjetit hierarkik të vëmendjes për zgjidhjen e problemeve të klasifikimit të emocioneve dhe ndjenjave. Sipas metrikave të SemEval 2018, sistemi ynë merr rezultatet përfundimtare prej 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 dhe 0.408 në 5 nënpyetje respektivisht.', 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ በሴምEval 2018 ውስጥ የስሜት እና አስተያየት ማተሚያ የUIR-Miner ስርዓት አቀረበ፡፡ የሥርዓታችን ሦስት የዋና አካባቢ ሰነድ ነው፤ ምርጫው ሞዴል፣ ስሜት እና እውቀትን ለመፍታት እና አስተያየት አካባቢ ምርጫዎች፣ ብዙ-label ክፍል ለመፍታት እና የስሜት ክፍተቶችን ለመፈተን የመረጃ ማተሚያ ሚዲሎችን ለመፍታት እና የስሜት ክፍተቶችን ለመፍታት ማሻሻሻል፡፡ የሴmEval 2018 ትምህርት፣ ስርዓታችን በ5 ደብዳቤዎች የኋለኛው ደረጃዎች 0.636፣ 0.531፣ 0.731፣ 0.708 እና 0.408 ነው።', 'tr': "Bu kagyt 2018-nji ýylda duýgular we duýgular çykyş sistemasyny Twitter'da SemEval'da çykýar. Biziň sistemimiz üç sany möhümden bar: öň-işlemek modul, duýgularyň we duýgularyň şissanlygynyň önümlerini çözmek üçin, LSTM şebek modul multi-etiket klasifikasyny çözmek üçin, we duýgularyň we duýgularyň soragyny çözmek üçin iýerşik üns modi. SemEval 2018 metriklerine görä sistemamyzyň soňky sany 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 we 0.408 diýip 5 subtasklarda bolýar.", 'af': "Hierdie papier voorsien 'n UIR-Miner stelsel vir emosie en sentimentanalisie evaluering in Twitter in SemEval 2018. Ons stelsel bestaan van drie hoofmodules: voorafverwerking module, stapeling module om die intensiteit voorskou van emosie en sentiment te los, LSTM netwerk module om multi- label klasifikasie te los, en die hierarkies aandag netwerk module vir die oplossing van emosie en sentiment klasifikasie probleem. Volgens die metries van SemEval 2018, ons stelsel kry die eindelike telling van 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 en 0,408 op 5 subtaske.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է UIT-Miner համակարգ զգացմունքների և զգացմունքների վերլուծության գնահատման համար Թվիթերում 2018 թվականին: Մեր համակարգը կազմված է երեք հիմնական մոդուլներից. նախամշակման մոդուլներից, կառուցվածքի մոդուլներից զգացմունքների և զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության կանխատեսման լուծման համար, LSMT ցանցի մոդուլներից բազմաթիկտիկ դասակարգումների լուծման համար, և հիերարխիկ ուշադրության ցանցի մոդուլներից զգա Ըստ 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԵվալ" մետրիկայի, մեր համակարգը ստանում է վերջնական գնահատականները՝ 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 և 0.408 5 ենթահարություններում:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval-də Twitter-da duyguları və hisslər analizi üçün UIR-Miner sistemini göstərir. Sistemimiz üç ana modulu var: əvvəlcə işləmə modulu, duyguların və hisslərin şiddətli tərzini çəkmək üçün, çoxlu etiket klasifikasyonu çəkmək üçün LSTM şəbəkə modulu və hisslərin və hisslərin klasifikasyonu çəkmək üçün hiyerarşik məlumatları şəbəkə modulu. SemEval 2018 metriklərinə görə, sistemimiz 5 subtasklarda 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 və 0,408 sonrakı nümunələri alır.', 'bn': 'This paper presents a UIR-Miner system for emotion and sentiment analysis evaluation in Twitter in SemEval 2018.  আমাদের সিস্টেমের মধ্যে তিনটি প্রধান মডিউল রয়েছে: প্রেসিং মডিউল, আবেগ এবং অনুভূতি সমাধানের জন্য স্ট্যাকিং মডিউল, অনেক শক্তিশালী ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী সমাধানের জন্য LSTM নেটওয়ার্ক মডিউল, অনুভ সেমইভাল ২০১৮ এর মেট্রিক অনুসারে, আমাদের সিস্টেম পরিমাণ ০. 636, 0. 531, 0. 731, 0. 708 এবং ৫ সাবট্যাক্সে ০. 408 পায়।', 'ca': "This paper presents a UIR-Miner system for emotion and sentiment analysis evaluation in Twitter in SemEval 2018.  El nostre sistema consisteix en tres móduls principals: módul de preprocessió, módul de pila per resoldre la predicció d'intensitat de l'emoció i el sentiment, módul de xarxa LSTM per resoldre la classificació multietiquetada, i módul de xarxa d'atenció jeràrquica per resoldre el problema de classificació de l'emoció i el sentiment. Segons les mètriques de SemEval 2018, el nostre sistema obté les puntuacions finals de 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 i 0,408 en 5 subtaskes, respectivament.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje UIR-Miner systém pro hodnocení emocí a sentimentů na Twitteru v SemEvalu 2018. Náš systém se skládá ze tří hlavních modulů: předzpracovávacího modulu, stohovacího modulu pro řešení predikce intenzity emocí a sentimentu, síťového modulu LSTM pro řešení klasifikace více štítků a hierarchického síťového modulu pozornosti pro řešení problému klasifikace emocí a sentimentů. Podle metrik SemEval 2018 získává náš systém konečné skóre 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 a 0.408 na pěti podúkolech.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja UIR-Miner sistem za procjenu emocija i sentimentalne analize na Twitter u semiEvalu 2018. Naš sistem se sastoji od tri glavnog modula: preobrađivanje modula, stajanje modula za rješavanje intenzitetne predviđanja emocija i osjećanja, LSTM mrežnog modula za rješavanje klasifikacije multietiketa, i hijerarhičkog mrežnog modula za rješavanje problema sa klasifikacijom emocija i osjećanja. Prema metricima semiEvala 2018, naš sistem dobija konačne rezultate od 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 i 0,408 na 5 podataka.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک سیستم ماینر UIR برای ارزیابی تحلیل احساسات و احساسات در توئیتر در نیمه Eval 2018 را نشان می دهد. سیستم ما از سه مولد اصلی است: مولد پیش پرداخت پیش پرداخت، مولد تنظیم برای حل پیش بینی شدت احساسات و احساسات، مولد شبکه LSTM برای حل classification multi-label، و مولد شبکه توجه زیادی برای حل مشکل تشخیص احساسات و احساسات. بر اساس متریک سامیولی ۲۰۱۸، سیستم ما امتیاز نهایی 0.636، 0.531، 0.731، 0.708، و 0.408 از پنج متریک دریافت می\u200cکند.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö tutvustab UIR-Mineri süsteemi emotsioonide ja sentimentaalsete analüüside hindamiseks Twitteris SemEval 2018. Meie süsteem koosneb kolmest peamisest moodulist: eeltöötlusmoodulist, virnastamismoodulist emotsioonide ja sentimentide intensiivsuse prognoosimise lahendamiseks, LSTM võrgumoodulist mitme märgisega klassifitseerimise lahendamiseks ja hierarhilise tähelepanuvõrgu moodulist emotsioonide ja sentimentide klassifitseerimise probleemi lahendamiseks. SemEval 2018 mõõdikute kohaselt saab meie süsteem lõplikud tulemused 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 ja 0,408 vastavalt viiele alamülesandele.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään UIR-Miner-järjestelmä tunteiden ja tunteiden analysointiin Twitterissä SemEval 2018. Järjestelmämme koostuu kolmesta päämoduulista: esikäsittelymoduulista, pinoamismoduulista tunteiden ja tunteiden voimakkuuden ennustamiseen, LSTM-verkkomoduulista monimerkkisen luokituksen ratkaisemiseen ja hierarkkisesta huomioverkostomoduulista tunteiden ja tunteiden luokitteluongelman ratkaisemiseen. SemEval 2018:n mittareiden mukaan järjestelmämme saa lopulliset pisteet 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 ja 0,408 viidessä alatehtävässä.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki gunakake sistem PIR-Miner kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan karo panjenengan kelas kuwi nggawe Tutter nang semebal 2013. Sistem dhéwé éntuk karo telu modul sing dirangkat: preprocessing module, staking module to Resolution Tulung nerimo sing metika sing semebal 2008, sistem dhéwé gak dhéwé tanggal 0.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar na bãyar da wani na'urar UIR-Minr wa ƙidãya wa hiso da analyki na hisia a Twitter in Semeval 2018. Tsarinmu na ƙunsa da module uku masu ƙari: module ta yi aiki a gaba-bayani, na fasaɗa module dõmin ya sola bayani na ɗabi'ar hisãbi da kuma hisia, modulen shirin LSSM dõmin ya nẽmi yin raba sigarin-daban-daban, da modulen aikin hisãbi na dabar-daban-daban, wa'urar da za'a samu'a wa masu buɗe wa fitina-ɗabi'a. Li gorkin metric na Semeval 2018, na'asarmu yana da ƙarshen score na daban na 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708 da 0.408 a kan aikin 5.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה מערכת UIR-Miner עבור הערכה של ניתוח רגשות ורגשות בטוויטר בסמיוול 2018. המערכת שלנו מורכבת משלושה מודולים ראשיים: מודול התמודדות, מודול העמידה כדי לפתור את חיזוי האינטנסיביות של רגשות ורגשות, מודול רשת LSTM לפתור קליזציה multi-label, והמודול רשת תשומת לב הייררכית לפתור בעיות קליזציה רגשות ורגשות. לפי המטריקות של SemEval 2018, המערכת שלנו מקבלת את התוצאות הסופיות של 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708, ו-0.408 על 5 תוצאות, בהתאם.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen UIR-Miner sistem za ocenjevanje čustev in sentimentalne analize v Twitterju v SemEvalu 2018. Naš sistem je sestavljen iz treh glavnih modulov: predprocesnega modula, zlagalnega modula za reševanje napovedi intenzivnosti čustev in sentimenta, omrežnega modula LSTM za reševanje večoznačne klasifikacije in hierarhičnega omrežja pozornosti za reševanje problema klasifikacije čustev in sentimenta. Po meritvah SemEval 2018 naš sistem dobi končne rezultate 0,636, 0,531, 0,731, 0,708 oziroma 0,408 na 5 podopravilih.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཨིན་ཨར་སི་-མིན་རིའི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ་དང་། སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྩིས Our system consists of three main modules: preprocessing module, stacking module to solve the intensity prediction of emotion and sentiment, LSTM network module to solve multi-label classification, and the hierarchical attention network module for solving emotion and sentiment classification problem. According to the metrics of SemEval 2018, our system gets the final scores of 0.636, 0.531, 0.731, 0.708, and 0.408 on 5 subtasks, respectively.'}
{'en': 'TCS Research at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Learning Robust Representations using Multi-Attention Architecture', 'ar': 'بحث TCS في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: تعلم التمثيلات القوية باستخدام بنية متعددة الاهتمامات', 'es': 'Investigación de TCS en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Aprendizaje de representaciones sólidas mediante la arquitectura de atención múltiple', 'fr': "TCS Research at SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Apprendre des représentations robustes à l'aide de l'architecture multi-attention", 'pt': 'Pesquisa TCS no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Aprendendo Representações Robustas usando Arquitetura de Multi-Atenção', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018でのTCSリサーチタスク1 ：マルチアテンションアーキテクチャを使用した堅牢な表現の学習', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 में TCS अनुसंधान: बहु-ध्यान वास्तुकला का उपयोग करके मजबूत प्रतिनिधित्व सीखना', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018 TCS 治事 1:用多力架构学鲁棒', 'ru': 'Исследование TCS на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Изучение надежных представлений с использованием архитектуры с несколькими вложениями', 'ga': 'TCS Research ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Léirithe Láidre a Fhoghlaim ag Úsáid Ailtireacht Ilairde', 'ka': 'TCS პასუხი SemEval-2018 პასუხში 1: პრობსტის გამოყენება გამოყენებული მრავალური აღქტიქტურის გამოყენება', 'el': 'Έρευνα στο έργο 1: Μάθηση ισχυρών αναπαραστάσεων χρησιμοποιώντας την αρχιτεκτονική πολλαπλών προσοχής', 'hu': 'TCS kutatás a SemEval-2018-ban 1. feladat: Robusztus reprezentációk tanulása Multi-Attention architektúrával', 'lt': 'TCS moksliniai tyrimai 2010–2018 m. pusėje 1 užduotis: mokytis patikimų atstovybių naudojant daugiametę architektūrą', 'it': "Ricerca TCS a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Imparare le rappresentazioni robuste utilizzando l'architettura multi-attenzione", 'kk': 'TCS зерттеулері 1- шегінші тапсырмасында: Көп қарау архитектурасын қолдану', 'mk': 'ТСС истражување на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Научување на силни претставувања со користење на архитектура со повеќе вниманија', 'ms': 'Carian TCS di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Belajar Perwakilan Kuat menggunakan Arkitektur Perhatian Berlebihan', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1- ലെ ടിസിഎസിഎ പരിശോധന: പല- ശ്രദ്ധ ശേഖരം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് റോബസ്റ്റ് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Riċerka tat-TCS f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Tagħlim ta’ Rappreżentazzjonijiet b’Saħħithom bl-użu ta’ Arkitettura ta’ Ħafna Attenzjoni', 'ro': 'Cercetare TCS la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Învățarea reprezentărilor robuste folosind arhitectura multi-atenție', 'pl': 'Badania TCS w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Nauka solidnych reprezentacji przy użyciu architektury Multi-Attention', 'si': 'TCS පරීක්ෂණය සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 1: ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': 'TCS Research at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Learning Robust Representations using Multi-Attention Architecture', 'mn': 'ТСХ-ын SemEval-2018 Task 1-ийн судалгаа: Олон-анхаарлын архитектурыг ашиглаж', 'no': 'TCS-forskning på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Læring av robust representasjonar ved hjelp av Multi Attention Architecture', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் TCS ஆராய்ச்சி 1: Multi- Attention Archiecture using Robust Representations Learning', 'sr': 'Istraživanje TCS-a na zadatku 1. polu-Eval-2018: Učenje robnih predstavljanja koristeći multi-Attention Architecture', 'sv': 'TCS Research på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Att lära sig robusta representationer med hjälp av Multi-Attention Architecture', 'ur': 'سیم ایولی-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں TCS تحقیق: مثبت توجه آرکٹیکٹر کے استعمال سے روبریست رئيسٹنسیٹ سیکھنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu ở Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-208: Phụ trách về học võ bằng kiến trúc đa chú ý', 'nl': 'TCS Onderzoek bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Robuuste representaties leren met behulp van Multi-Attention Architecture', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Научаване на здрави представителства с помощта на архитектура с много внимание', 'da': 'TCS Research på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Læring af robuste repræsentationer ved hjælp af Multi-Attention Architecture', 'hr': 'Istraživanje TCS-a na zadatku 1. polu-Eval-2018: učenje robnih predstavljanja koristeći arhitekturu višepozornosti', 'ko': 'SemEval-2018의 TCS 연구 과제 1: 다중 주의력 구조를 이용하여 안정적인 표징을 학습한다.', 'id': 'TCS Research at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Learning Robust Representations using Multi-Attention Architecture', 'de': 'TCS-Forschung bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Robuste Repräsentationen mithilfe von Multi-Attention-Architektur lernen', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa TCS kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Kufundisha Mazungumzo ya Robust kwa kutumia Maktaba ya Kuchunguza', 'fa': 'تحقیقات TCS در وظیفه ۱ نیم Eval-2018: یاد گرفتن نمایندگان استفاده از طریق معماری زیادی توجه', 'af': 'TCS Verondersoek by SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Onderleer robust voorstellings met Multi-Attention Architecture', 'tr': 'TCS Research at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Learning Robust Representations using Multi-Attention Architecture', 'sq': 'TCS Research at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Learning Robust Representations using Multi-Attention Architecture', 'am': 'የTCS ምርመራ at SemEval-2018 ስራ 1: Learning Robust Representations using Multi-Attention Architecture', 'az': 'TKS araştırması 1. Gözəl: Çoxlu-Attention Arhitektura istifadə edərək möhkəm göstərilmələri öyrənmək', 'hy': 'Առաջին հանձնարարությունը՝ Սովորել ուժեղ ներկայացումներ օգտագործելով բազմաուշադրություն դարձնող արխիկտություն', 'ca': 'TCS Research at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Learning Robust Representations using Multi-Attention Architecture', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের টিসিএস গবেষণা ১: বহুগুরুত্বপূর্ণ আর্কিচেক্ট ব্যবহার করে রোবাস্ট প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Istraživanje TCS-a na zadatku 1. polu-Eval-2018: Učenje robnih predstavljanja koristeći arhitekturu višepozornosti', 'fi': 'TCS-tutkimus SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Kestävien edustustojen oppiminen monihuomioarkkitehtuurin avulla', 'cs': 'Výzkum TCS na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Učení robustních reprezentací pomocí architektury Multi-Attention', 'et': 'TCS teadusuuringud SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Tugevate esinduste õppimine mitme tähelepanu arhitektuuri abil', 'jv': 'TTS Pesuransi nang seminval-2008 task 1: Learning Job representations with Multi-Attance architecture', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'he': 'מחקר TCS ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 1: ללמוד מייצגים חזקים באמצעות ארכיטקטורה רבת תשומת לב', 'sk': 'Raziskava TCS na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Učenje robustnih predstavitev z uporabo večpozornosti arhitekture', 'bo': 'TCS Research at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Learning Robust Representations using Multi-Attention Architecture'}
{'en': 'This paper presents system description of our submission to the SemEval-2018 task-1 : Affect in tweets for the English language. We combine three different features generated using deep learning models and traditional methods in support vector machines to create a unified ensemble system. A robust representation of a tweet is learned using a multi-attention based architecture which uses a mixture of different pre-trained embeddings. In addition to this analysis of different features is also presented. Our system ranked 2nd, 5th, and 7th in different subtasks among 75 teams.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة وصفًا لنظام تقديمنا إلى SemEval-2018 Task-1: التأثير في التغريدات الخاصة باللغة الإنجليزية. نحن نجمع بين ثلاث ميزات مختلفة تم إنشاؤها باستخدام نماذج التعلم العميق والأساليب التقليدية في آلات المتجهات الداعمة لإنشاء نظام مجموعة موحد. يتم تعلم التمثيل القوي للتغريدة باستخدام بنية متعددة الاهتمامات تستخدم مزيجًا من حفلات الزفاف المختلفة المدربة مسبقًا. بالإضافة إلى هذا التحليل من الميزات المختلفة يتم تقديمه أيضًا. حصل نظامنا على المرتبة الثانية والخامسة والسابعة في مهام فرعية مختلفة من بين 75 فريقًا.', 'fr': "Cet article présente la description du système de notre soumission à la tâche SEMEval-1\xa0: Affect dans les tweets pour la langue anglaise. Nous combinons trois fonctionnalités différentes générées à l'aide de modèles d'apprentissage profond et de méthodes traditionnelles dans les machines à vecteurs de support pour créer un système d'ensemble unifié. Une représentation robuste d'un tweet est apprise à l'aide d'une architecture multi-attention qui utilise un mélange de différents intégrations pré-entraînées. En plus de cette analyse des différentes caractéristiques est également présentée. Notre système s'est classé 2e, 5e et 7e dans différentes sous-tâches parmi 75 équipes.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta a descrição do sistema de nossa submissão ao SemEval-2018 task-1: Affect in tweets for the English language. Combinamos três recursos diferentes gerados usando modelos de aprendizado profundo e métodos tradicionais em máquinas de vetor de suporte para criar um sistema de conjunto unificado. Uma representação robusta de um tweet é aprendida usando uma arquitetura baseada em multi-atenção que usa uma mistura de diferentes embeddings pré-treinados. Além desta análise de diferentes características também é apresentada. Nosso sistema ficou em 2º, 5º e 7º em diferentes subtarefas entre 75 equipes.', 'es': 'Este documento presenta la descripción del sistema de nuestro envío a la tarea-1 de SemeVal-2018: Efecto en los tuits para el idioma inglés. Combinamos tres características diferentes generadas mediante modelos de aprendizaje profundo y métodos tradicionales en máquinas de vectores de soporte para crear un sistema de conjuntos unificado. Se aprende una representación sólida de un tweet mediante una arquitectura basada en múltiples atenciones que utiliza una combinación de diferentes incrustaciones previamente entrenadas. Además de este análisis de las diferentes características también se presenta. Nuestro sistema ocupó el segundo, quinto y séptimo lugar en diferentes subtareas entre 75 equipos.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018 task -1: Affect in tweets for the English languageへの提出物のシステム説明を紹介する。私たちは、ディープラーニングモデルと従来の方法を使用して生成された3つの異なる機能をサポートベクターマシンに組み合わせて、統一されたアンサンブルシステムを作成します。ツイートの堅牢な表現は、さまざまな事前トレーニングされた埋め込みの混合を使用するマルチアテンションベースのアーキテクチャを使用して学習されます。これに加えて、異なる特徴の分析も提示する。当社のシステムは、75チームの異なるサブタスクで2位、5位、7位にランクインしました。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 कार्य-1 के लिए हमारे सबमिशन का सिस्टम विवरण प्रस्तुत करता है: अंग्रेजी भाषा के लिए ट्वीट्स में प्रभावित होता है। हम एक एकीकृत पहनावा प्रणाली बनाने के लिए समर्थन वेक्टर मशीनों में गहरी सीखने के मॉडल और पारंपरिक तरीकों का उपयोग करके उत्पन्न तीन अलग-अलग सुविधाओं को जोड़ते हैं। एक ट्वीट का एक मजबूत प्रतिनिधित्व एक बहु-ध्यान आधारित वास्तुकला का उपयोग करके सीखा जाता है जो विभिन्न पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग के मिश्रण का उपयोग करता है। इसके अलावा विभिन्न विशेषताओं का विश्लेषण भी प्रस्तुत किया गया है। हमारी प्रणाली 75 टीमों के बीच विभिन्न उप-कार्यों में 2, 5 वीं और 7 वीं रैंक पर है।', 'zh': '本文引SemEval-2018事-1系统描述:英语推文之。 吾将深学模形之三向量机中,以创一集成系统。 推文者,所以用架构学也,所以架构异教也。 自此以外,犹介其异。 75团队异子排名第2,第5与第7。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлено системное описание нашего представления для задачи SemEval-2018-1: Влияние в твитах для английского языка. Мы объединяем три различные функции, сгенерированные с использованием моделей глубокого обучения и традиционных методов в поддерживающих векторных машинах для создания единой ансамблевой системы. Надежное представление твита изучается с использованием архитектуры, основанной на множественном внимании, которая использует смесь различных предварительно обученных вложений. В дополнение к этому представлен также анализ различных признаков. Наша система заняла 2-е, 5-е и 7-е места в различных подзадачах среди 75 команд.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo cur síos córais i láthair ar ár n-aighneacht do thasc-1 SemEval-2018: Tionchar i dtvuíteanna don Bhéarla. Le chéile againn trí ghné éagsúla a ghintear ag baint úsáide as samhlacha foghlama domhain agus modhanna traidisiúnta i meaisíní veicteora tacaíochta chun córas ensemble aontaithe a chruthú. Foghlaimítear léiriú láidir tweet ag baint úsáide as ailtireacht ilairdeach a úsáideann meascán de leabaithe réamh-oilte éagsúla. Chomh maith leis an anailís seo ar ghnéithe éagsúla i láthair freisin. Bhain ár gcóras 2ú, 5ú, agus 7ú háit i bhfothascanna éagsúla i measc 75 fhoireann.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის სისტემის გამოსახულება ჩვენი წარმოდგენის SemEval-2018 რაოდენობა-1: შემდეგ ტევიტებში ინგლისური ენაზე. ჩვენ სამი განსხვავებული ფუნქციების შექმნა, რომლებიც გამოყენებული ძალიან სწავლების მოდელები და ტრადიციონალური მეტოვების გამოყენება გვქტორის მაქანებში ერთადერთი Tweet-ის ძალიან ძალიან გამოსახულება იყოს, რომელიც მრავალური დაახლოებით აქტიქტიქტურის გამოყენება, რომელიც გამოყენებს განსხვავებული პრეტრექტირებულ დაახლოების შე ამ განსხვავებული განსხვავებულებების ანალიზაციის დამატებით აღმოჩვენება. ჩვენი სისტემა 2, 5 და 7-ში სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვად', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την περιγραφή του συστήματος της υποβολής μας στο έργο Επίδραση στα tweets για την αγγλική γλώσσα. Συνδυάζουμε τρία διαφορετικά χαρακτηριστικά που παράγονται χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης και παραδοσιακές μεθόδους στις διανυσματικές μηχανές υποστήριξης για να δημιουργήσουμε ένα ενοποιημένο σύστημα συνόλων. Μια εύρωστη αναπαράσταση ενός tweet μαθαίνεται χρησιμοποιώντας μια αρχιτεκτονική βασισμένη σε πολλαπλή προσοχή, η οποία χρησιμοποιεί ένα μείγμα διαφορετικών προ-εκπαιδευμένων ενσωματώσεων. Εκτός από αυτή την ανάλυση των διαφόρων χαρακτηριστικών παρουσιάζεται επίσης. Το σύστημά μας κατατάχθηκε 2η, 5η και 7η σε διάφορες υποτάξεις μεταξύ 75 ομάδων.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің жүйеңіздің half Eval-2018 тапсырмасына жіберіміздің сипаттамасын көрсетеді: ағылшын тілінің tweets- тіліне әсер етеді. Біз біріктірілген ензембл жүйесін құру үшін вектордың қолдау механизмінде үш түрлі өзгертілген мүмкіндіктерді біріктіреміз. Твиттің көптеген архитектурасын қолдану үшін көптеген архитектурасы қолданылады. Бұл әртүрлі алдын- ала оқылған ендіруді қолданады. Басқа мүмкіндіктердің анализациясын қоса да көрсетіледі. Біздің жүйеіміз 75 топ арасында екінші, 5-ші және 7-ші жазылып тұрды.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas mūsų pranešimo SemEval-2018 užduotis 1: Poveikis tweetuose anglų kalba. Sujungiame tris skirtingus elementus, sukurtus naudojant gilaus mokymosi modelius ir tradicinius paramos vektorių mašin ų metodus, siekiant sukurti vieningą ensemblio sistemą. tvirtai atspindi tweet ą naudojant daugiapusišką architektūrą, kurioje naudojamas įvairių iš anksto apmokytų įrangų mišinys. Be to, pateikiama įvairių savybių analizė. Mūsų sistema buvo antra, penkta ir septinta skirtingų 75 komandų pakopų.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 feladat-1: Hatás tweetekben az angol nyelvre. Három különböző funkciót kombinálunk mélytanulási modellek és hagyományos módszerek segítségével a vektorgépek támogatásában, hogy egy egységes együttes rendszert hozzunk létre. A tweet robusztus ábrázolását egy többfigyelemre épülő architektúra segítségével tanuljuk meg, amely különböző előre képzett beágyazások keverékét használja. Ezen túlmenően bemutatjuk a különböző jellemzők elemzését is. Rendszerünk 75 csapat között második, ötödik és hetedik helyen állt.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan keterangan sistem penghantaran kita ke SemEval-2018 tugas-1: Kesan dalam tweet untuk bahasa Inggeris. Kami menggabungkan tiga ciri-ciri yang berbeza yang dijana menggunakan model belajar dalam dan kaedah tradisional dalam mesin vektor sokongan untuk mencipta sistem ensemble bersatu. Perwakilan kuat tweet dipelajari menggunakan arkitektur berasaskan perhatian-berbilang yang menggunakan campuran pelbagai bentuk terlatih-terlatih. Selain analisis ini bagi ciri-ciri berbeza juga dipaparkan. Sistem kita berturut-turut ke-2, ke-5, dan ke-7 dalam subtasks yang berbeza di antara 75 pasukan.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta la descrizione del sistema della nostra presentazione al SemEval-2018 task-1: Affect in tweet per la lingua inglese. Combiniamo tre diverse funzionalità generate utilizzando modelli di deep learning e metodi tradizionali nelle macchine vettoriali di supporto per creare un sistema di ensemble unificato. Una rappresentazione robusta di un tweet viene appresa utilizzando un'architettura basata su multi-attenzione che utilizza una miscela di diverse incorporazioni pre-addestrate. Oltre a questa analisi delle diverse caratteristiche è anche presentata. Il nostro sistema si è classificato secondo, quinto e settimo in diverse sottoattività tra 75 squadre.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2018 task-1-д бичсэн системийн тодорхойлолтыг хэлж байна: Англи хэл дээр tweets хийх нөлөөлдөг. Бид гүнзгий суралцах загвар болон уламжлалтын арга загварыг ашиглаж, нэгтгэл загварын системийг бүтээх боломжтой гурван өөр өөр өөр төрлүүдийг нэгтгэдэг. Твиттийн шинжлэх ухаан нь олон анхаарал суурилсан архитектурыг ашиглаж суралцдаг. Өөр өөр өөр дүрсийн шинжилгээнд ч мөн тайлбарлана. Бидний систем 75 багийн хоорондох хоёр, таван, 7-р дахь дахь дарааллаар дүрслэгдсэн.', 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува системски опис на нашето поднесување на SemEval-2018 задача-1: Влијание на твитови за англискиот јазик. Комбинираме три различни карактеристики генерирани со користење на модели за длабоко учење и традиционални методи во поддршка на векторните машини за создавање единствен енсемблен систем. Совршено претставување на твитот се научи со користење на архитектура базирана на повеќето внимание која користи мешавина од различни предобучени вградувања. Покрај оваа анализа на различни карактеристики е, исто така, претставена. Нашиот систем се рангираше на вториот, петтиот и седмиот во различни потпрашања меѓу 75 тимови.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono opis systemu naszego zgłoszenia do zadania SemEval-2018-1: Wpływ w tweetach na język angielski. Łączymy trzy różne funkcje generowane przy użyciu modeli głębokiego uczenia i tradycyjnych metod w maszynach wektorowych wsparcia, aby stworzyć ujednolicony system zespołu. Solidną reprezentację tweeta uczy się przy użyciu architektury opartej na wielu uwagach, która wykorzystuje mieszankę różnych wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń. Oprócz tej analizy przedstawiono również różne cechy. Nasz system był drugi, piąty i siódmy w różnych podzadaniach wśród 75 drużyn.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta deskrizzjoni tas-sistema tas-sottomissjoni tagħna lis-SemEval-2018 task-1: Affett in tweets for the English language. Nikkombinaw tliet karatteristiċi differenti ġġenerati bl-użu ta’ mudelli ta’ tagħlim profond u metodi tradizzjonali f’magni ta’ appoġġ għall-vetturi biex in ħolqu sistema ta’ ensemble unifikata. Rappreżentazzjoni robust a ta’ tweet titgħallem bl-użu ta’ arkitettura bbażata fuq ħafna attenzjonijiet li tuża taħlita ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet imħarrġa minn qabel differenti. Barra minn din l-analiżi ta’ karatteristiċi differenti hija ppreżentata wkoll. Our system ranked 2nd, 5th, and 7th in different subtasks among 75 teams.', 'ml': 'This paper presents system description of our submission to the SemEval-2018 task-1: Affect in tweets for the English language.  ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളും പാരമ്പര്യമായ രീതികളും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d യന്ത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു യൂണിക്കൂട്ടിയ എന്\u200d ഒരു ട്വീറ്റിന്\u200dറെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d ഒരു റോബോസ്റ്റ് പഠിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പല ശ്രദ്ധ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടേഷന വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ ഈ അന്വേഷണം കൂടാതെ കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ രണ്ടാമത്തേത്, അഞ്ചാമത്തേതും, ഏഴാമത്തേതും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഉപജോലികളിലാണ്.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă descrierea sistemului depunerii noastre la sarcina SemEval-2018-1: Afect în tweet-uri pentru limba engleză. Combinăm trei caracteristici diferite generate folosind modele de învățare profundă și metode tradiționale în mașinile vectoriale de sprijin pentru a crea un sistem unificat de ansamblu. O reprezentare robustă a unui tweet este învățată folosind o arhitectură bazată pe mai multe atenții, care utilizează un amestec de diferite încorporări pre-instruite. În plus față de această analiză a diferitelor caracteristici este, de asemenea, prezentată. Sistemul nostru s-a clasat pe locul 2, 5 și 7 în diferite subactivități în rândul a 75 de echipe.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser systemskildring av vårt tilføring til semiEval-2018 task-1: Etter tweets for engelsk språk. Vi kombinerer tre ulike funksjonar genererte med dype læringsmodeller og tradisjonelle metodar i støttevektormaskiner for å laga eit einaste ensembelsystemet. Name I tillegg til denne analysen av ulike funksjonar vert også presentert. Sistemet vårt rangerte 2., 5. og 7. i ulike underspørsmål blant 75 grupper.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar systembeskrivning av vårt bidrag till SemEval-2018 uppgift-1: Påverkan i tweets för det engelska språket. Vi kombinerar tre olika funktioner som genereras med hjälp av djupinlärningsmodeller och traditionella metoder för att stödja vektormaskiner för att skapa ett enhetligt ensemblesystem. En robust representation av en tweet lärs sig med hjälp av en multi-uppmärksamhet baserad arkitektur som använder en blandning av olika pre-utbildade inbäddningar. Utöver denna analys av olika egenskaper presenteras också. Vårt system rankades 2:a, 5:e och 7:e i olika underuppgifter bland 75 lag.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் SemEval- 2018 பணி- 1: ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு தான் தொடர்புகளில் பாதிக்கப்பட்டது. நாம் மூன்று வேறு வித்தியாசமான குணங்களை உருவாக்கிய ஆழமான கற்றல் மாதிரிகள் மற்றும் மரபார்ந்த முறைகளை துணைப்பிக்கிறோ A robust representation of a tweet is learned using a multi-attention based architecture which uses a mixture of different pre-trained embeddings.  வேறு குணங்களுக்கு மேலும் இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி கூடுதல் காட்டப்படுகிறது. எங்கள் அமைப்பு 75 குழுக்களில் உள்ள வேறு துணை பணிகளில் 2வது, 5வது மற்றும் 7வது நிறைந்தது.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہمارے سامنے سیستم کی تعریف سیم Eval-2018 task-1 کے لئے پیش کرتا ہے: انگلیسی زبان کے لئے ٹویٹوں میں اثر ہے. ہم تین مختلف ویٹروں کی مدینوں کے مطابق عمیق تعلیم مدینل اور سنتی طریقے سے پیدا کئے گئے ہیں کہ ایک متحدہ اینسامبل سیسٹم بنائیں۔ ایک ٹویٹ کی ایک مضبوط نمونی سیکھی جاتی ہے ایک multi-attention بنیادی معماری کے مطابق جو مختلف پیش آموزش کی آموزش کی مخلوقات کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے. اور اس طرح مختلف فرصت کی تحلیل بھی پیش کیے جاتے ہیں۔ ہمارا سیستم دوسرا، پنٹا اور ساتا درجہ ہے 75 ٹیموں کے درمیان مختلف سٹسٹسٹ میں۔', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sistemski opis našeg podnošenja pola Evala-2018 zadatku-1: Afekt na tweets za engleski jezik. Kombinujemo tri različite karakteristike koje su proizvedene koristeći duboke modele učenja i tradicionalne metode u motorima za podršku vektora kako bi stvorili jedinstven sistem ensembla. Snažna predstavljanja tweet a se nauči koristeći multipažnju baziranu arhitekturu koja koristi mješavinu različitih predobučenih integracija. Uz ovu analizu različitih karakteristika se takođe predstavlja. Naš sistem je redovao 2., 5. i 7. u različitim podkazama među 75 tima.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතියේ විස්තර විස්තරයක් සෙම්වෙල් 2018 කාර්ය-1 වලට පෙන්වන්නේ: ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව සඳහා ට් අපි වෙනස් අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් තුනක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය වෙක්ටර් මැෂින් සහයෝග ට්විට් එකේ ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා වඩා අවධානයක් අධිකාරිත විද්\u200dයාපයක් භාවිත කරනවා වගේ වෙනස වෙනස් විශේෂතාවක් ගැන මේ විශ්ලේෂණය සමහරවිට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්. අපේ පද්ධතිය අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් වෙනස් කණ්ඩායම් 75ක් වෙනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් දෙවෙනි පද්ධතිය', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa soo saara sawirida nidaamka warqaddayada loo soo dhiibay shaqada SemEval-2018-1: Wax ku saabsan Tweetka afka Ingiriiska. Sadex tayo oo kala duduwan oo lagu soo dhashay tusaalaha waxbarashada mool dheer iyo qaababka caadiga ah oo lagu kaalmeeyo mashiinadaha vector si aan u abuurno nidaam kooban. Rugta waxaa la bartaa mid ku qoran Tweet, kaas oo isticmaalaya dhismaha aad u fiirsan karto, kaas oo isticmaalaya isku xiriir ka mid ah baaraandegista hore. Analyskaas waxaa sidoo kale lagu soo bandhigaa faahfaahin kala duduwan. nidaamkayagii waxay ka qeyb-qaadatay shaqooyin kala duduwan oo ka mid ah 75 koox.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 vazifa- 1: Ingliz tilidagi Twitterdan ta'siri. Biz yuqori o'rganish modellari va traditional usullarni qoʻllash uchun vektor mashinalarini birlashtirish uchun uchta boshqa shakllarni birlashtiramiz. Twitterdan robot tashkilotlari, bir necha muhimlik asosiy maktablar bilan o'rganadi. Bu boshqa o'rganilgan boshqa bir o'rganishdan foydalanadi. Bu boshqa xossalarning analyzerini qoʻshish uchun ham koʻrsatiladi. Our system ranked 2nd, 5th, and 7th in different subtasks among 75 teams.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu mô tả hệ thống chúng ta đã đệ trình nhiệm vụ SemEvol-208: Đặt tên trên Twitter cho ngôn ngữ tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi kết hợp ba tính năng khác nhau tạo ra bằng các mô hình học sâu và các phương pháp truyền thống trong các cỗ máy hỗ trợ vector để tạo ra một hệ thống kết hợp. Một cách mô tả mạnh mẽ của một dòng tweet được học sử dụng một kiến trúc đa chú ý sử dụng một hỗn hợp các sự gắn kết khác nhau. Ngoài việc phân tích các tính năng khác nhau cũng được trình bày. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đứng thứ hai, thứ năm, và thứ bảy trong các hạng mục khác nhau trong số 75.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя системно описание на нашето представяне на задача-1: Въздействие в туитове за английски език. Ние комбинираме три различни функции, генерирани чрез модели на дълбоко обучение и традиционни методи в поддържащи векторни машини, за да създадем единна ансамбълна система. Здраво представяне на туит се научава с помощта на архитектура, базирана на множество внимание, която използва смесица от различни предварително обучени вграждания. В допълнение към този анализ на различни характеристики е представен и. Системата ни се класира на второ, пето и седмо място в различни подзадачи сред 75 отбора.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert een systeembeschrijving van onze inzending aan de SemEval-2018 taak-1: Effect in tweets voor de Engelse taal. We combineren drie verschillende functies gegenereerd met behulp van deep learning modellen en traditionele methoden in ondersteunende vectormachines om een verenigd ensemble systeem te creëren. Een robuuste weergave van een tweet wordt geleerd met behulp van een multi-attention gebaseerde architectuur die een mix van verschillende vooraf getrainde embeddings gebruikt. Naast deze analyse van verschillende kenmerken wordt ook gepresenteerd. Ons systeem scoorde 2e, 5e en 7e in verschillende subtaken onder 75 teams.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer systembeskrivelse af vores indsendelse til SemEval-2018 opgave-1: Påvirkning i tweets for det engelske sprog. Vi kombinerer tre forskellige funktioner genereret ved hjælp af deep learning modeller og traditionelle metoder i støtte vektormaskiner for at skabe et samlet ensemble system. En robust repræsentation af et tweet læres ved hjælp af en multi-opmærksomhed baseret arkitektur, der bruger en blanding af forskellige præ-trænede indlejringer. Ud over denne analyse af forskellige funktioner præsenteres også. Vores system rangerede 2., 5. og 7. i forskellige underopgaver blandt 75 hold.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt eine Systembeschreibung unserer Einreichung zur SemEval-2018 Aufgabe-1: Affekt in Tweets für die englische Sprache vor. Wir kombinieren drei verschiedene Funktionen, die mithilfe von Deep-Learning-Modellen und traditionellen Methoden in Support-Vektormaschinen generiert werden, um ein einheitliches Ensemblesystem zu schaffen. Eine robuste Darstellung eines Tweets wird mithilfe einer Multi-Aufmerksamkeits-basierten Architektur erlernt, die eine Mischung aus verschiedenen vortrainierten Einbettungen verwendet. Zusätzlich zu dieser Analyse werden verschiedene Merkmale vorgestellt. Unser System wurde Zweiter, Fünfter und Siebter in verschiedenen Teilaufgaben unter 75-Teams.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sistemski opis našeg podnošenja zadatku-1 na pola Evala-2018: utjecaj na tweets za engleski jezik. Kombiniramo tri različite karakteristike koje su proizvedene koristeći duboke modele učenja i tradicionalne metode u strojevima za podršku vektora za stvaranje ujedinjenog sustava ensembla. Jaka predstavljanja tweet a se uči koristeći multipažnju baziranu arhitekturu koja koristi mješavinu različitih predobučenih ugrađenja. Uz ovu analizu različitih karakteristika se također predstavlja. Naš sustav je redovao 2., 5. i 7. u različitim podkazama među 75 tima.', 'id': 'This paper presents system description of our submission to the SemEval-2018 task-1: Affect in tweets for the English language.  Kami menggabungkan tiga fitur yang berbeda yang dihasilkan menggunakan model belajar dalam dan metode tradisional dalam mesin vektor dukungan untuk menciptakan sistem ensemble yang bersatu. Perwakilan yang kuat dari tweet dipelajari menggunakan arsitektur berdasarkan banyak perhatian yang menggunakan campuran dari pembangunan yang berlatih sebelumnya. Selain analisis ini dari fitur yang berbeda juga dipaparkan. Sistem kita mengatur kedua, lima, dan tujuh dalam subtasks yang berbeda di antara 75 tim.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18 미션1:영어 트윗에 제출된 감정의 체계적인 묘사를 소개한다.우리는 깊이 있는 학습 모델과 벡터기의 전통적인 방법으로 생성된 세 가지 서로 다른 특징을 결합하여 통일된 통합 시스템을 구축한다.하나의 추문의 건장함은 여러 가지 주의를 바탕으로 하는 구조를 사용하여 학습한 것을 나타낸다. 이 구조는 서로 다른 예비 훈련을 혼합하여 삽입한 것이다.이외에도 서로 다른 특징을 분석했다.우리 시스템은 75개 팀의 서로 다른 하위 임무 중 2위, 5위, 7위에 랭크되어 있다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz sistemiň halkara 2018-nji Görevimize gönderilýän zady-1: Iňlisçe dili üçin tweets etmäge mümkin edýär. Üç farklı özellikleri derin öğrenme modellerini ve geleneksel vektör makinelerini birleştirmek için oluşturduğu örnekleri birleştir. Tweet'in güýçli suraty bir multi-üns tabanly arhitektura ulanarak öwrenilýär. Bu sistemde farklı öňünden öňünden öňünden gelen integralaryň karışmasyny ulanýar. Bu dürli özellikleriň çözümleriniň üstine hem görkezildi. Biziň sistemamyz 75 topar arasynda 2-nji, 5-nji we 7-nji suratlar bardyr.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linatoa maelezo ya mfumo wa ujumbe wetu kwa kazi ya SemEval-2018-1: Inaathiri katika twiti kwa lugha ya Kiingereza. Tunaunganisha taswira tatu tofauti zilizotengenezwa kwa kutumia mifano ya kujifunza za ndani na mbinu za kitamaduni za kuunga mkono mashine za vector kutengeneza mfumo wa mfumo wa pamoja. Uwakilishaji wa twita wa kibaguzi umejifunza kwa kutumia ujenzi wa msingi wa kutangaza vizuri vinavyotumia mchanganyiko wa mabomu tofauti yaliyofunzwa kabla. Zaidi ya uchambuzi huu wa tabia tofauti pia unaonyeshwa. Mfumo wetu ulikuwa na rangi ya 2, 5 na 7 katika kazi tofauti kati ya timu 75.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ توضیح سیستم تحویل ما به کار-۱ نیم Eval-2018: اثر در توئیت برای زبان انگلیسی است. ما سه ویژگی متفاوت را با استفاده از مدل های یادگیری عمیق و روش های سنتی در ماشین های پشتیبانی ویکتور برای ایجاد یک سیستم انجمن متحد ترکیب می کنیم. یک نمایش قوی از یک تویت با استفاده از یک معماری بسیاری از توجه متفاوت یاد می\u200cگیرد که از ترکیب پیوندهای پیش آموزش متفاوت استفاده می\u200cکند. در addition to this analysis of different features is also presented. سیستم ما درجه دوم، پنجم و هفتم درجه\u200cهای متفاوت بین ۷۵ تیم بود.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stelsel beskrywing van ons onderskrywing aan die SemEval-2018 taak-1: Afteken in tweets vir die Engelstaal. Ons kombinieer drie verskillende eienskappe wat genereer word deur diep leer modele en tradisionele metodes in ondersteunde vektor masjiene om 'n eenvoudige ensemble stelsel te skep. 'n Kragtige voorstelling van 'n tweet word geleer deur te gebruik 'n multi-aandag gebaseerde arkitektuur wat gebruik 'n gemengsel van verskillende vooraf-opgelei inbêding. In addition to this analysis of different features is also presented. Ons stelsel het 2de, 5de en 7de in verskillende subtaske onder 75 teams rangeer.", 'sq': 'This paper presents system description of our submission to the SemEval-2018 task-1: Affect in tweets for the English language.  Ne kombinojmë tre karakteristika të ndryshme të gjeneruara duke përdorur modele mësimi të thellë dhe metoda tradicionale në mjetet e mbështetjes të vektorëve për të krijuar një sistem të unifikuar ensemble. Një përfaqësim i fortë i një tweet mësohet duke përdorur një arkitekturë të bazuar në shumë vëmendje që përdor një përzierje të përziera të ndryshme të paratrajnuara. Përveç kësaj analize të karakteristikave të ndryshme paraqet gjithashtu. Sistemi ynë u rendit i dyti, i pesti dhe i shtati në nëndetyra të ndryshme midis 75 ekipave.', 'hy': "Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է մեր ներկայացման համակարգի նկարագրությունը ՍեմԵվալ 2018-ի առաջարկին' Անգլերեն լեզվի թվիթերում ազդեցություն: Մենք համադրում ենք երեք տարբեր հատկանիշներ, որոնք ստեղծվում են օգտագործելով խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդելներ և ավանդական մեթոդներ' օգտագործելով վեկտորների մեքենաներ միավոր համակարգ ստեղծելու համար: Թվիթերի ուժեղ ներկայացումը սովորվում է օգտագործելով բազմաուշադրության հիմնված ճարտարապետություն, որը օգտագործում է տարբեր նախապատրաստված ներդրումների խառնուրդ: Բացի տարբեր հատկանիշների վերլուծությունից ներկայացված է նաև: Մեր համակարգը դասակարգված էր երկրորդ, հինգերորդ և յոթներորդ 75 թիմերի տարբեր ենթաթերթերում:", 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim göndərməyimizin sistem təsbiqini semiEval-2018 task-1: İngilizə dilinə tweets etmişdir. Biz üç fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli məsələləri birləşdiririk ki, dərin öyrənmə modelləri və dəstəkli metodları destək vektör makinelərində birləşdiririk, birləşdirilmiş ensemble sistemini yaratmaq üçün. Tövyenin möhkəm göstərilməsi çoxlu ünvanlı arhitektir vasitəsilə öyrənirilir ki, müxtəlif əvvəl təhsil edilmiş inbinglərin karışmasını istifadə edir. Müxtəlif fərqli xüsusiyyətlərin analizi də göstəriləcəkdir. Sistemimiz 75 dəstə arasında 2, 5 və 7 dəstədir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজ-১-এর প্রতি আমাদের প্রদানের ব্যবস্থার বর্ণনা দিয়েছে: ইংরেজি ভাষার জন্য টুইটে প্রভা আমরা তিনটি ভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য যা গভীর শিক্ষা মডেল এবং ঐতিহ্যবাহী পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে সমর্থন করি ভেক্টর মেশিনের জন্য একটি এক একটি টুইটের প্রতিনিধিত্বে একটি রোবস্টের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখা হয়েছে বহুভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক কাঠামো ব্যবহার করে যা বিভিন্ন প্রশিক বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিশ্লেষণ ছাড়াও প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে। আমাদের সিস্টেম ৭৫ দলের মধ্যে দ্বিতীয়, ৫ এবং ৭তম বিভিন্ন সাবট্যাক্সে পরিচালিত হয়েছে।', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለስምEval-2018 ስራ-1 የደረጃችንን የስርዓት ዝርዝርት ያቀርባል፡፡ የጥልቅ ትምህርት ሞዴል እና የባሕላዊ ሥርዓቶችን ለመደገፍ የዌር መሳሪያዎችን ለመደገፍ የተለየውን ሦስት የተለያዩ ምርጫዎች እናሳስባለን፡፡ በትዊተር ላይ የሮቦት መልዕክት በብዙ አካባቢ መሠረት የተማረ ነው፡፡ ከዚህም ምርጫዎች በላይ የተለያዩ ምርጫዎች ደግሞ ተገልጦአል፡፡ ስርዓታችን ሁለት፣ 5ኛ እና ሰባተኛው በተለየ ባሕላዊ ጉዳዮች መካከል ነው።', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta la descripció del sistema de la nostra presentació a la tasca SemEval-2018 1: Afectat en tweets per a la llengua anglesa. Combinem tres característiques diferents generades usant models d'aprenentatge profund i mètodes tradicionals en màquines de suport per a crear un sistema unificat d'ensembles. Una representació robust a d'un tweet s'aprene fent servir una arquitectura basada en molta atenció que utilitza una mezcla de diferents incorporacions pré-entrenats. A més d'aquesta anàlisi de diferents característiques també es presenta. El nostre sistema es va classificar en segon, quinto i sétimen diferents subtaskes entre 75 equips.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje systémový popis našeho podání na úlohu SemEval-2018-1: Efekt ve tweetech pro anglický jazyk. Kombinujeme tři různé funkce generované pomocí modelů hlubokého učení a tradičních metod v podpůrných vektorových strojích k vytvoření jednotného souborového systému. Robustní reprezentace tweetu se naučí pomocí architektury založené na více pozornosti, která využívá směs různých předškolených vložení. Kromě této analýzy je také prezentována analýza různých vlastností. Náš systém byl druhý, pátý a sedmý v různých dílčích úkolech mezi 75 týmy.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse süsteemi kirjeldus meie esitamisest SemEval-2018 ülesandele 1: mõju säutsides inglise keeles. Ühendame kolm erinevat funktsiooni, mis on loodud sügavõppe mudelite ja traditsiooniliste meetodite abil vektormasinates, et luua ühtne ansambli süsteem. Tugevat säutsu esitamist õpetatakse mitme tähelepanu põhineva arhitektuuri abil, mis kasutab erinevate eelnevalt koolitatud manustamiste segu. Lisaks sellele analüüsile erinevad omadused on esitatud ka. Meie süsteem oli 75 meeskonna seas teisel, viiendal ja seitsmendal kohal erinevates alamülesannetes.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sistemski opis našeg podnošenja zadatku-1 semiEval-2018: utjecaj na tweets za engleski jezik. Kombinujemo tri različite karakteristike koje su proizvedene koristeći duboke modele učenja i tradicionalne metode u strojevima za podršku vektora za stvaranje ujedinjenog sistema ensembla. Jaka predstavljanja tweet a se nauči koristeći multipažnju baziranu arhitekturu koja koristi mješavinu različitih predobučenih integracija. Uz ovu analizu različitih karakteristika se također predstavlja. Naš sistem je redovao 2., 5. i 7. u različitim podkazama među 75 tima.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään järjestelmäkuvaus SemEval-2018 task-1: Affect in tweets for English language. Yhdistämme kolme erilaista syväoppimismallien ja perinteisten menetelmien avulla luotua toimintoa tukivektorikoneissa yhtenäisen kokonaisuusjärjestelmän luomiseksi. Tweetin vankka esitys opitaan käyttämällä monihuomiopohjaista arkkitehtuuria, joka käyttää sekoitusta erilaisia esikoulutettuja upotuksia. Tämän lisäksi esitetään analyysi eri piirteistä. Järjestelmämme sijoittui toiseksi, viidenneksi ja seitsemänneksi eri alitehtävissä 75 tiimin joukossa.', 'jv': 'Ngerungan iki nggawe sistem akeh nggambar nggawe Sistem Sistem Keterangan kanggo Tarjamah-2008 task-1: AfAfAfet kanggo tuwit kanggo langgambar Inggris We combine 3 @title: window Nambah penting iki banget karo akeh sampeyan sampeyan mrana dadi. Sistem awak dhéwé wis rampung tanggal 2, 5, lan 7 ing panjenengan karo dolanan sing gak 75.', 'ha': "Bu takardan na gaurar da siffarmu na'urar da ma'aikin mu zuwa the SemEl-2018-1: An ƙulla masu cikin littattafani na Ingiriya. Tuna haɗa wasu sifati uku dabam-daban da aka ƙididdige su da misãlai masu amfani da shiryarwa masu ƙaranci da shiryoyin ayuka masu amfani da, don ka sami wata na'urar fanel mai haɗi. An sanar wani mai gaya wa wani littãfi na Twitter, ana yi amfani da bakin filikin multi-muhalli wanda ke amfani da wani gaura na daban-taƙaita. Da baka wannan analũri wa wasu huskõki na dabam'a, za'a nuna. SysteminMu na danganta ta na 2, 5 da 7 cikin jama'a saba'a dabam.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג תיאור מערכת של ההעברה שלנו למשימה SemEval-2018: השפעה בטוויטים לשפה האנגלית. אנחנו משלבים שלושה תכונות שונות שנוצרו באמצעות דוגמנים למידה עמוקה ושיטות מסורתיות במכונות ויקטורים לתמוך כדי ליצור מערכת אנזמבל מאוחדת. מייצג חזק של טוויט נלמד באמצעות ארכיטקטורה מבוססת על תשומת לב רבה שמשתמשת בתערובת של תוכניות מואמנות מראש שונות. In addition to this analysis of different features is also presented.  המערכת שלנו התייצבה ב-2, ב-5, ו-7 בתחתונים שונים בין 75 קבוצות.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen opis sistema naše oddaje na nalogo 1 SemEval-2018: Vpliv v tweetih za angleški jezik. Združujemo tri različne funkcije, ustvarjene z uporabo modelov globokega učenja in tradicionalnih metod v podpornih vektorskih strojih za ustvarjanje enotnega ansambla sistema. Robustna predstavitev tweeta se nauči z uporabo arhitekture, ki temelji na več pozornosti, ki uporablja mešanico različnih vnaprej usposobljenih vdelav. Poleg te analize različnih značilnosti je predstavljena tudi. Naš sistem se je med 75 ekipami uvrstil na 2., 5. in 7. mesto v različnih podnalogah.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ལ་ཞིབ་པ་དེ་SemEval-2018 task-1: We combine three different features generated using deep learning models and traditional methods in support vector machines to create a unified ensemble system. Tweet ་འདིའི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཅན་གྱི་ངོ་བོར་སྟོན་པ་ཞིག་ནི་ཡིས་སྒྲུབ་གྱིས་གཞི་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་བཀོད་དང་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་སྤྱོ ཆོས་ཉིད་མ་འདྲ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དག་ཀྱང་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དབུགས་དབྱིབས་མཐོ་ཕྱེད་གཉིས་དང་། ༥པ་དང་། ༧་པ་དེ་ཚོ་ཕྱོགས་གཞན་མཚུངས་པའི་subtasks 75ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'ar': 'DMCB في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: نقل تعلم تصنيف المشاعر باستخدام Group LSTM للتنبؤ بكثافة العاطفة', 'fr': "DMCB au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Apprentissage par transfert de la classification des sentiments à l'aide du LSTM de groupe pour la prédiction de l'intensité", 'es': 'DMCB en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Transferir el aprendizaje de la clasificación de sentimientos mediante LSTM grupal para la predicción de la intensidad de las emociones', 'pt': 'DMCB no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Transferência de Aprendizagem de Classificação de Sentimentos Usando Grupo LSTM para Previsão de Intensidade Emocional', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のDMCBタスク1 ：感情強度予測のためのグループLSTMを使用した感情分類の転送学習', 'zh': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 职1:用组LSTM情度情类迁学', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर DMCB: भावना तीव्रता भविष्यवाणी के लिए समूह LSTM का उपयोग कर भावना वर्गीकरण के स्थानांतरण सीखना', 'ru': 'DMCB на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Перенос обучения классификации сентиментов с использованием группы LSTM для прогнозирования интенсивности эмоций', 'ga': 'DMCB ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Foghlaim Rangú Meonchain a Aistriú Ag Úsáid Grúpa LSTM chun Déine Mothúcháin a thuar', 'ka': 'DMCB SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 1: სტრანტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციის შესწავლობა ჯგუფის გამოყენება LSTM ემოციონის ინტენენტივის წარმოდგენისთვის', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Μάθηση μεταφοράς της ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων χρησιμοποιώντας την ομάδα για την πρόβλεψη της έντασης συναισθημάτων', 'hu': 'DMCB a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Az érzelmi osztályozás átadásának tanulása a csoport LSTM segítségével az érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzésére', 'kk': 'DMCB 1- тапсырманың semiEval- 2018 тапсырмасында: көңіл тұрақтығын бақылау үшін топ LSTM қолдану', 'it': "DMCB a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Trasferimento di apprendimento della classificazione dei sentimenti utilizzando LSTM di gruppo per la previsione dell'intensità emotiva", 'mk': 'DMCB на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Пренос на учење на класификација на чувства користејќи група LSTM за предвидување на емоционална интензитет', 'lt': 'DMCB per 2018 m. pusmetį 1 užduotis: Perkelti jautrumo klasifikaciją naudojant LSTM grupę emocinio intensyvumo prognozei', 'ms': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'ml': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'mn': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'no': 'DMCB ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Overføring av følgjande klassifikasjon ved bruk av gruppe LSTM for forhåndsvising av følgjande intensitet', 'mt': 'DMCB f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Tagħlim tat-Trasferiment tal-Klassifikazzjoni tas-Sentimenti bl-Użu tal-Grupp LSTM għat-tbassir tal-Intensità Emozzjonali', 'pl': 'Zadanie 1: Transfer Nauki Klasyfikacji Sentymentów przy użyciu grupy LSTM do przewidywania intensywności emocji', 'ro': 'DMCB la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Transfer de învățare a clasificării sentimentelor folosind LSTM de grup pentru predicția intensității emoționale', 'so': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'si': 'DMCB at semeval-2018 Job 1: Transfer Training of Sentiment Classication Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensty forecast', 'sv': 'DMCB på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Överföra inlärning av känsloklassificering med hjälp av grupp LSTM för prediktion av känslointensitet', 'sr': 'DMCB na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Naučenje prijevoznog klasifikacije korištenja grupe LSTM za predviđanje intenzitete emocija', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1 میں DMCB: Sentiment Classification کی استعمال گروپ LSTM کے لئے ایموٹینسیٹی پیش بینی کے لئے', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் DMCB: உணர்வு உணர்வு வகையாக்கத்தை பயன்படுத்தும் குழு LSTM யை பயன்படுத்தி உணர்வு Intensity முன்னதாக மாற்று', 'vi': 'Quyền Trung thực tại SemEvdịch-thẩm 8 Task 1: truyền học về đánh giá cảm xúc qua tập đoàn LSTM cho dự đoán độ mạnh của cảm xúc', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 1: Emotion Intensity prediction uchun Sentiment Classification Ushbu guruh LSTM yordamida Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Трансферно обучение на класификация на чувствата чрез използване на групов ЛСТМ за прогнозиране на емоционалната интензивност', 'da': 'DMCB ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Overførsel af følelsesklassificering ved hjælp af gruppe LSTM til forudsigelse af følelsesintensitet', 'nl': 'DMCB op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Transfer Leren van Sentiment Classificatie met behulp van Groep LSTM voor Emotie Intensiteit voorspelling', 'hr': 'DMCB na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Naučenje prijenosne klasifikacije korištenja grupe LSTM za predviđanje intenzitete emocija', 'id': 'DMCB di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity Prediction', 'fa': 'DMCB در تابع ۱ در نیمه Eval-2018: انتقال یادگیری از کلاس\u200cسازی مجموعه استفاده از گروه LSTM برای پیش\u200cبینی هوشمندی احساسات', 'ko': 'DMCB가SemEval-18년의임무1:팀LSTM을 사용하여 정서강도예측정서분류전이학습', 'de': 'DMCB bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification mittels Group LSTM zur Vorhersage der Emotionsintensität', 'af': 'DMCB by SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Oordrag leer van Sentiment Klassifikasie gebruik groep LSTM vir Emosie Intensiteit voorskou', 'tr': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'hy': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'sw': 'DMCB katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Kuhamisha Ufunzi wa Kufunguliwa kwa Seneti Kutumia Kundi la LSTM kwa ajili ya kutabiri Ujasiri', 'sq': 'DMCB në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity Prediction', 'az': "DMCB'in SemEval-2018 Task 1: Sentiment Klasifikasyonun √ñyr…ônm…ôsi √ñyr…ônm…ôsi √ñyr…ônm…ôsi √ñyr…ônm…ôsi √ñyr…ônm…ôsi √ñyr…ônm…ôsi", 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজের ডিএমসিবি: Emotion Intense ভবিষ্যতের জন্য সেনিটেমেন্ট ক্লাসিকেশনের শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করা গ্রুপ এলসিএম ব্যবহার করা শিক্ষা প', 'bs': 'DMCB na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Naučenje prijevoznog klasifikacije korištenja grupe LSTM za predviđanje intenzitete emocija', 'cs': 'Úkol 1: Transfer učení klasifikace sentimentů pomocí skupinového LSTM pro predikci emoční intenzity', 'et': 'DMCB SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Sentimentide klassifitseerimise ülekandmine, kasutades rühma LSTM emotsioonide intensiivsuse prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'DMCB SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Tunteluokituksen siirtäminen ryhmäLSTM:n avulla tunteiden voimakkuuden ennustamiseen', 'ca': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'sk': 'DMCB na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Prenos učenja klasifikacije čustev z uporabo skupine LSTM za napovedovanje intenzivnosti čustev', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'DXMB at seminval-2008 task 1: transfer Learning', 'bo': 'DMCB at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning of Sentiment Classification Using Group LSTM for Emotion Intensity prediction', 'he': 'DMCB ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: לימוד העברה של שיעור רגש בשימוש קבוצה LSTM'}
{'en': 'This paper describes a system attended in the SemEval-2018 Task 1 Affect in tweets that predicts emotional intensities. We use Group LSTM with an attention model and transfer learning with sentiment classification data as a source data (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). A transfer model structure consists of a source domain and a target domain. Additionally, we try a new dropout that is applied to LSTMs in the Group LSTM. Our system ranked 8th at the subtask 1a (emotion intensity regression). We also show various results with different architectures in the source, target and transfer models.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامًا تم حضوره في مهمة SemEval-2018 1 "التأثير في التغريدات" والتي تتنبأ بكثافة المشاعر. نستخدم Group LSTM مع نموذج الانتباه وننقل التعلم ببيانات تصنيف المشاعر كبيانات مصدر (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). يتكون هيكل نموذج النقل من مجال مصدر ومجال مستهدف. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نحاول الانسحاب الجديد الذي يتم تطبيقه على LSTMs في Group LSTM. احتل نظامنا المرتبة الثامنة في المهمة الفرعية 1 أ (انحدار شدة العاطفة). نعرض أيضًا نتائج متنوعة ببنيات مختلفة في نماذج المصدر والهدف والتحويل.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve um sistema atendido na Tarefa 1 do SemEval-2018 “Afeto nos tweets” que prevê intensidades emocionais. Usamos o Grupo LSTM com um modelo de atenção e transferimos o aprendizado com dados de classificação de sentimentos como dados de origem (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Uma estrutura de modelo de transferência consiste em um domínio de origem e um domínio de destino. Além disso, tentamos um novo dropout que é aplicado a LSTMs no Grupo LSTM. Nosso sistema ficou em 8º lugar na subtarefa 1a (regressão da intensidade da emoção). Também mostramos vários resultados com diferentes arquiteturas nos modelos de origem, destino e transferência.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe un sistema al que se asistió en la Tarea 1 de Semeval-2018 «Afecto en los tuits» que predice las intensidades emocionales. Utilizamos LSTM grupal con un modelo de atención y transferimos el aprendizaje con datos de clasificación de sentimientos como datos de origen (Tarea 4a de SemEval 2017). Una estructura de modelo de transferencia consiste en un dominio de origen y un dominio de destino. Además, probamos un nuevo abandono que se aplica a los LSTM del grupo LSTM. Nuestro sistema ocupó el octavo lugar en la subtarea 1a (regresión de la intensidad de las emociones). También mostramos varios resultados con diferentes arquitecturas en los modelos de origen, destino y transferencia.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit un système suivi dans le cadre de la tâche 1 «\xa0Affect in tweets\xa0» du SEMEVAL-2018 qui prédit les intensités émotionnelles. Nous utilisons Group LSTM avec un modèle d'attention et l'apprentissage par transfert avec des données de classification des sentiments comme données sources (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Une structure de modèle de transfert se compose d'un domaine source et d'un domaine cible. De plus, nous tentons un nouveau abandon qui s'applique aux LSTM du groupe LSTM. Notre système s'est classé 8e à la sous-tâche 1a (régression de l'intensité des émotions). Nous présentons également divers résultats avec différentes architectures dans les modèles source, cible et de transfert.", 'ja': '本稿では、感情の強さを予測するSemEval -2018タスク1「ツイートに影響を与える」に参加したシステムについて説明する。注意モデルを用いたグループLSTMを使用し、センチメント分類データをソースデータとして学習を転送する（ SemEval 2017 Task 4 a ）。転送モデル構造は、ソースドメイン及びターゲットドメインからなる。さらに、グループLSTMのLSTMに適用される新しいドロップアウトを試みます。私たちのシステムは、サブタスク1 a （感情の強度回帰）で8位でした。また、ソース、ターゲット、転送モデルの異なるアーキテクチャで様々な結果を示します。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2018务1"推文之感",当系统可以测情度。 以 Group LSTM 合用,以情数为迁学(SemEval 2017 Task 4a)。 传输结构由源域域。 试将新辍学用 LSTM 组中 LSTM。 系子职1a(情归)排名第8位。 吾示异于传输形之中架构也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 टास्क 1 में भाग लेने वाली एक प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है "ट्वीट्स में प्रभाव" जो भावनात्मक तीव्रता की भविष्यवाणी करता है। हम एक ध्यान मॉडल के साथ समूह LSTM का उपयोग करते हैं और एक स्रोत डेटा (SemEval 2017 कार्य 4a) के रूप में भावना वर्गीकरण डेटा के साथ सीखने को स्थानांतरित करते हैं। एक स्थानांतरण मॉडल संरचना में एक स्रोत डोमेन और एक लक्ष्य डोमेन होता है। साथ ही, हम समूह LSTM में LSTMs के लिए लागू किया जाता है एक नया ड्रॉपआउट का प्रयास करें। हमारा सिस्टम सबटास्क 1 ए (भावना तीव्रता प्रतिगमन) में 8 वें स्थान पर है। हम स्रोत, लक्ष्य और हस्तांतरण मॉडल में विभिन्न आर्किटेक्चर के साथ विभिन्न परिणाम भी दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система, посещаемая в Задаче 1 SemEval-2018 «Влияние в твитах», которая предсказывает эмоциональную интенсивность. Мы используем Group LSTM с моделью внимания и переносом обучения с данными классификации настроений в качестве исходных данных (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Структура модели переноса состоит из исходного домена и целевого домена. Кроме того, мы попробуем новый возврат, который применяется к LSTM в группе LSTM. Наша система заняла 8-е место в подзадаче 1а (регрессия интенсивности эмоций). Мы также показываем различные результаты с различными архитектурами в исходной, целевой и передаточной моделях.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chóras ar a bhfreastalaítear i dTasc 1 SemEval-2018 “Affect in tweets” a thuarann déine mhothúchánach. Úsáidimid Grúpa LSTM le múnla aird agus aistrímid foghlaim le sonraí aicmithe meon mar shonraí foinse (SemEval 2017 Tasc 4a). Is éard atá i struchtúr samhail aistrithe ná fearann foinseach agus fearann sprice. Ina theannta sin, bainimid triail as leagan amach nua a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar LSTManna sa Ghrúpa LSTM. Bhí ár gcóras san 8ú háit ag an bhfothasc 1a (aischéimniú déine mothúcháin). Léiríonn muid freisin torthaí éagsúla le hailtireachtaí éagsúla sna samhlacha foinse, sprioc agus aistrithe.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy olyan rendszert ír le, amely részt vett a SemEval-2018 "Hatás tweetekben" című feladatban, amely érzelmi intenzitásokat jelez. A Csoport LSTM-t figyelemmodellként használjuk, és a tanulást érzelmi osztályozási adatokkal továbbítjuk forrásadatként (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Az átviteli modell struktúra egy forrástartományból és egy céltartományból áll. Ezenkívül kipróbálunk egy új kilépést, amelyet az LSTM csoportban alkalmaznak LSTM-ekre. Rendszerünk a 8. helyen állt az 1a altérben (érzelmi intenzitás regresszió). A forrás-, cél- és transzfer modellekben különböző architektúrákkal kapcsolatos eredményeket is bemutatunk.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει ένα σύστημα που παρακολούθησε το έργο 1 "Επίδραση στα tweets" που προβλέπει συναισθηματικές εντάσεις. Χρησιμοποιούμε την Ομάδα με μοντέλο προσοχής και μεταφέρουμε τη μάθηση με δεδομένα ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων ως πηγαία δεδομένα (Εργασία 4α). Μια δομή μοντέλου μεταφοράς αποτελείται από έναν τομέα προέλευσης και έναν τομέα προορισμού. Επιπλέον, δοκιμάζουμε ένα νέο παράπτωμα που εφαρμόζεται στα LSTMs του ομίλου LSTM. Το σύστημά μας κατατάχθηκε 8η στην υποταγή 1α (παλινδρόμηση έντασης συναισθημάτων). Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης διάφορα αποτελέσματα με διαφορετικές αρχιτεκτονικές στα μοντέλα προέλευσης, στόχου και μεταφοράς.', 'ka': "ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერს სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval-2018 დავასწავლეთ სამუშაო დავასწავლეთ სამუშაო დავასწავლეთ სამუშაო 1-ში 'შემდეგ Tweets-ში'  ჩვენ ჯგუფი LSTM გამოყენებთ მოდულის მოდელი და გასწავლების შესახებ სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციის მონაცემებით (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Name დამატებით, ჩვენ დავცდილობთ ახალი გადატანა, რომელიც LSTMs-ზე დაყენებული LSTM-ში. ჩვენი სისტემა გადაწყენებული 8-ე პროგრამა 1a-ში (ემოციონის ინტენსტივის რეგრესია). ჩვენ ასევე განსხვავებული შედეგების გამოჩვენება განსხვავებული არქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტირებით გამოჩვენება მსოფლიოში, მისაწყისი", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma sistema, dalyvaujanti 1 užduotyje „Poveikis tweetams“, kurioje numatomas emocinis intensyvumas. Naudojame LSTM grupę su dėmesio modeliu ir perduodame mokymąsi su jautrumo klasifikavimo duomenimis kaip šaltinio duomenis (SemEval 2017 užduotis 4a). Perdavimo modelio struktūrą sudaro šaltinio domenas ir tikslinis domenas. Be to, bandome naują atsisakymą, kuris taikomas LSTM grupėje LSTM. Mūsų sistema buvo 8-oji paklausoje 1a (emocijos intensyvumo regresija). Taip pat parodome įvairius rezultatus su skirtingomis šaltinio, tikslinių ir perdavimo modelių architektūromis.', 'mk': 'Овој весник опишува систем кој присуствуваше на SemEval-2018 задачата 1 „Влијание на твитови“ која предвидува емоционални интензитети. Користиме група ЛСТМ со модел на внимание и трансферираме учење со податоци за класификација на чувствата како извор на податоци (SemEval 2017 задача 4a). A transfer model structure consists of a source domain and a target domain.  Покрај тоа, пробуваме ново откажување кое се применува на ЛСТМ во групата ЛСТМ. Нашиот систем се рангираше на осмиот на подпрашањето 1a. Исто така, покажуваме различни резултати со различни архитектури во изворот, метата и моделите за трансфер.', 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang hadir dalam SemEval-2018 Tugas 1 'Affect in tweets' yang meramalkan intensiti emosional. Kami menggunakan LSTM Kumpulan dengan model perhatian dan pembelajaran pemindahan dengan data kelasukan perasaan sebagai data sumber (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Struktur model pemindahan terdiri dari domain sumber dan domain sasaran. Lagipun, kita cuba keluar baru yang dilaksanakan pada LSTM dalam LSTM Kumpulan. Sistem kita berturut-turut ke-8 di subtask 1a (regresi intensiti emosi). Kami juga menunjukkan beberapa keputusan dengan arkitektur yang berbeza dalam sumber, sasaran dan model pemindahan.", 'ml': "ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടെസ്ക്കില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്നത് 'ടൂട്ടികളില്\u200d പ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഗ്രൂപ്പ് LSTM ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ശ്രദ്ധ മാതൃകയോടെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ഡേറ്റായി പഠിക്കുന് ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഡൊമെയിനിലും ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യം ഡൊമെയിനിലും ഒരു മാതൃകയുണ്ട്. കൂടുതല്\u200d LSTM ഗ്രൂപ്പില്\u200d LSTM പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുതിയ ഡ്രോപ്പുട്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ 8 മണിക്കാണിച്ചു (വികാരത്തിന്റെ വീണ്ടും വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നത്) സ്രോതസ്സ്, ലക്ഷ്യം, മാറ്റാന്\u200d മോഡലുകളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീകങ്ങളുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത ഫലങ്ങളും കാണിക്കുന്നു.", 'it': "Questo articolo descrive un sistema partecipato al Task 1 SemEval-2018 'Affect in tweet' che prevede intensità emotive. Usiamo il gruppo LSTM con un modello di attenzione e trasferiamo l'apprendimento con i dati di classificazione sentimentale come dati sorgente (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Una struttura di modello di trasferimento consiste di un dominio sorgente e di un dominio di destinazione. Inoltre, proviamo un nuovo dropout che viene applicato agli LSTM nel gruppo LSTM. Il nostro sistema si è classificato ottavo al sottotask 1a (regressione dell'intensità emotiva). Mostriamo anche vari risultati con diverse architetture nei modelli sorgente, target e trasferimento.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-2018 Task 1 "Tweets-д нөлөөлөх нөлөөлөх" системийг тайлбарладаг. Энэ нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчтэй байдлыг тайлбарладаг. Бид Групп LSTM-г анхаарлын загвартай ашиглаж, мэдрэмжтэй хуваалцах өгөгдлийг эх үүсвэрийн өгөгдлийн хэлбэртэй шилжүүлж суралцах хэрэгтэй (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Тайлбарлах загварын бүтэц эх үүсвэрийн холбоотой болон зорилготой холбоотой. Мөн бид LSTM-ын LSTMs-д хэрэглэгддэг шинэ салбарыг оролдож байна. Бидний систем 1a-ын доогуур асуултын 8-р дүрс. Мөн бид өөр өөр архитектуруудын үр дүнг эх үүсвэр, зорилго, шилжүүлэлт загварууд дээр харуулж байна.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бірінші "Твиттерде қатынау" жүйесінің бірінші тапсырмасында қатынау жүйесін таңдайды. Бұл эмоциялық қатынаулығын таңдайды. Біз LSTM тобын көзінің деректері ретінде назар үлгісімен және оқыту үлгісімен көзінің шектеу деректерін көзінің деректері ретінде қолданамыз (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Тасымалдау үлгісінің құрылымы көзі домен мен мақсатты домен болады. Сонымен қатар, LSTM тобындағы LSTMs- ге қолданылатын жаңа қапшығын көрейік. Біздің жүйеміз 1а асты сұрағында 8-ші ретінде (емоциялық қанықтығының регрессиясы). Біз сондай-ақ басқа архитектуралардың түрлі нәтижелерін көзі, мақсат және аудару үлгілерінде көрсетедік.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano system uczestniczący w zadaniu SemEval-2018 1 "Efekt w tweetach", który przewiduje intensywność emocjonalną. Używamy grupy LSTM z modelem uwagi i transferujemy naukę z danymi klasyfikacji sentymentów jako danymi źródłowymi (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Struktura modelu transferu składa się z domeny źródłowej i domeny docelowej. Dodatkowo próbujemy nowego wycofania, który jest stosowany do LSTMów w grupie LSTM. Nasz system zajął się ósmym miejscem w podzadaniu 1a (regresja intensywności emocji). Pokazujemy również różne wyniki z różnymi architekturami w modelu źródłowym, docelowym i transferowym.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver eit systemet som er delta i halvEval-2018 oppgåva 1 « Effekt i tweets » som foregår emosjonelle intensitet. Vi bruker gruppe LSTM med eit oppmerksmodell og overføringsmodul med sentimentklassifikasjonsdata som kjeldedata (semiEval 2017 Task 4a). Name I tillegg prøver vi ein ny slepp som vert brukt til LSTMs i gruppa LSTM. Sistemet vårt rangert 8. på underspørjinga 1a (regresjon av emosjonsintensitet). Vi viser også ulike resultat med ulike arkitektur i kjelde, mål og overføringsmodulane.', 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 1 'ට්විට් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්' කිරීමේ පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා, ඒ වගේම හැඟීමත් අවශ්\u200d අපි කණ්ඩායම LSTM පාවිච්චි කරන්නේ අවධානය මදුල් සහ ප්\u200dරවිච්චි සංවේදනය දත්ත සමඟ ප්\u200dරවිච්චි දත්ත (සෙම ප්\u200dරවර්තන නිර්මාණයක් ස්ථාපනයක් තියෙනවා මුළු ඩෝමේන් එකක් සහ ඉලක්ක ඩෝමේන් එකක්. අඩුත්, අපි අළුත් පැත්තක් උත්සාහ කරනවා ඒක LSTMs වලට LSTM වලින්. අපේ පද්ධතිය අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් 8යි. අපි වගේම වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ වෙනස් ස්ථාපනය, ඉලක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරතිචා", 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi sistema attenduta fis-SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affett in tweets' li tipprevedi intensitajiet emozzjonali. Aħna nużaw il-Grupp LSTM b’mudell ta’ attenzjoni u nittrasferixxu t-tagħlim b’dejta tal-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti bħala dejta tas-sors (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Struttura ta’ mudell ta’ trasferiment tikkonsisti f’dominju tas-sors u dominju fil-mira. Barra minn hekk, nippruvaw tneħħija ġdida li tiġi applikata għal LSTMs fil-Grupp LSTM. Is-sistema tagħna kklassifikat fit-tmien post fis-sottostaqsi 1a (rigressjoni tal-intensità emozzjonali). Aħna nuru wkoll diversi riżultati b’arkitetturi differenti fil-mudelli tas-sors, tal-mira u tat-trasferiment.", 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaam ka soo qeybqaaday SemEval-2018 Shaqada 1 'Affect ku yaal tweetka' oo predicta qalabka emotional. Waxaynu guryaha LSTM ku isticmaalnaa tusaale ahaan daryeelka caafimaadka iyo waxaynu ku wareejinaynaa waxbarashada iskuulka xisaabta xisaabta ah (SemEval 2017 shaqo 4a). Tusaale u wareejinta waxaa ka mid ah domain source iyo domain goal. Sidoo kale waxaynu isku daynaa dhibaato cusub oo lagu codsaday LSTM kooxda LSTM. nidaamkayagii waxay ka qeyb-dhigtay 8aad shabakada 1a (dib u celinta hissiga). Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaa resultooyin kala duduwan oo ay leeyihiin dhismo kala duduwan oo ay ku yaalaan noocyada, goal- iyo wareejinta.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver ett system som deltog i SemEval-2018 Task 1 "Påverkan i tweets" som förutspår känslomässiga intensiteter. Vi använder Group LSTM med en uppmärksamhetsmodell och överför lärande med sentimentklassificeringsdata som källdata (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). En överföringsmodellstruktur består av en källdomän och en måldomän. Dessutom testar vi en ny dropout som tillämpas på LSTM i gruppen LSTM. Vårt system rankades 8:e på subaktivitet 1a (emotion intensity regression). Vi visar även olika resultat med olika arkitekturer i käll-, mål- och överföringsmodeller.', 'ta': "This paper describes a system attended in the SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affect in tweets' that predicts emotional intensities.  நாம் ஒரு கவனம் மாதிரி மற்றும் உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தல் தரவை மூல தரவாக மாற்றுகிறோம். Name மேலும், LSTM குழுவில் LSTMs க்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட புதிய வெளியீட்டை முயற்சிக்கிறோம். நமது கணினி துணை பணியில் 8வது நிறைவேற்றப்பட்டது (உணர்வு உறுதியான திருப்புதல்) நாம் மூலத்தில், இலக்கு மற்றும் மாதிரிகளில் வேறு பின்னணி அடைவுகளை காட்டுகிறோம்.", 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie un sistem participat la SemEval-2018 Task 1 "Afect în tweet-uri" care prezice intensitățile emoționale. Utilizăm Grupul LSTM cu un model de atenție și transferăm învățarea cu datele de clasificare a sentimentelor ca date sursă (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). O structură de model de transfer constă dintr-un domeniu sursă și un domeniu țintă. În plus, încercăm un nou abandon care este aplicat LSTM-urilor din grupul LSTM. Sistemul nostru s-a clasat pe locul 8 la subsarcina 1a (regresia intensității emoționale). De asemenea, prezentăm diferite rezultate cu diferite arhitecturi în modelele sursă, țintă și transfer.', 'ur': "یہ کاغذ ایک سیسٹم کی توئیٹ میں حاضر ہوئی ٹوئیٹ میں 'اثر' کی توصیف کرتا ہے جو احساساتی اثر سے پیش بینی کرتا ہے۔ ہم گروپ LSTM کو ایک توجه موڈل کے ساتھ استعمال کرتے ہیں اور sentiment classification data کے ساتھ سیکھنے کے ساتھ سیکھنے کے ساتھ استعمال کرتے ہیں (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Name اور اضافہ، ہم ایک نئی ڈروپوٹ کی کوشش کریں جو گروپ LSTM میں LSTMs پر لازم کیا جاتا ہے. ہمارا سیستم 1a کے ساتھ آٹھ درجہ تھا۔ ہم نے بھی مختلف نتیجے دکھائے ہیں جن کے ساتھ مختلف معماری موجودات، موجود اور انتقال موڈل میں ہیں۔", 'sr': "Ovaj novinar opisuje sistem koji je prisustvovan u zadatku 1 za poluvremenu evalu-2018 'utjecaj na tweets' koji predviđa emocionalnu intenzitet. Koristimo grupu LSTM sa modelom pažnje i prebacivanjem učenja sa podacima klasifikacije sentiment a kao izvorski podaci (zadatak 4a za semiEval 2017). Struktura model a prijenosa se sastoji od izvornog domena i ciljnog domena. Osim toga, pokušavamo novu potisnicu koja se primjenjuje na LSTMs u grupi LSTM. Naš sistem je postavio 8. na podpitanju 1a (regresija emocionalne intenzitete). Također pokazujemo različite rezultate sa različitim arhitekturom u izvoru, meta i prebacivanju modela.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả một hệ thống tham dự vào Nhiệm vụ SemEvol-2008 "Yêu cầu tweet" để dự đoán mức độ kích thích cảm xúc. Chúng tôi dùng tập đoàn LSTM với một mô hình tập trung và truyền tập tin với các dữ liệu phân loại cảm xúc như dữ liệu nguồn (SemEvol Ben7 Task 4a). Mô hình giao hàng bao gồm một miền gốc và một miền đích. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi thử loại bỏ mới được áp dụng cho LSTM trong tập đoàn LSTM. Hệ thống của chúng ta xếp hạng thứ 8th theo phần 1a (đo độ rung động). Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy các kết quả khác nhau với các kiến trúc khác nhau trong mẫu nguồn, mục tiêu và truyền tải.', 'uz': "This paper describes a system attended in the SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affect in tweets' that predicts emotional intensities.  Biz Grupatdan foydalanuvchi modeli bilan foydalanamiz va sentiment classification maʼlumotini manba maʼlumot deb o'rganamiz (SemEval 2017 Vazifa 4a). Name Qo'shimcha, LSTM guruhida LSTM (LSTM) ga qoʻllanilgan yangi qoʻyishni urinamiz. Bizning 8 chi tizimmiz 1 vazifani o'zgartiradi. Biz manba, shaxsiy va transfer modellarida har xil natijalarni ko'rsamiz.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва система, присъстваща в задача 1 "Въздействие в туитове", която прогнозира емоционалната интензивност. Използваме Групов ЛСТМ с модел на внимание и прехвърляме обучението с данни за класификация на сентимента като изходни данни (Задача 4а). Структурата на трансферния модел се състои от домейн източник и целев домейн. Освен това, ние опитваме ново отпадане, което се прилага за ЛТМ в Групата ЛТМ. Нашата система се класира на 8-мо място в подзадачата 1а (регресия на емоционалната интензивност). Показваме и различни резултати с различни архитектури в моделите източник, цел и трансфер.', 'hr': "Ovaj papir opisuje sustav koji je prisustvovan u zadatku 1 iz polovine Evala-2018 'utjecaj na tweets' koji predviđa emocionalnu intenzitet. Koristimo grupu LSTM sa model pažnje i učenjem prijenosa s podacima klasifikacije osjećaja kao izvorski podaci (zadatak 4a iz semiEval 2017). Struktura model a prijenosa sastoji se od izvornog domena i ciljnog domena. Osim toga, pokušavamo novu potisnicu koja se primjenjuje na LSTMs u grupi LSTM. Naš sustav je postavio 8. na podpitanju 1a (regresija emocionalne intenzitete). Također pokazujemo različite rezultate s različitim arhitekturom u modelima izvora, cilja i prenošenja.", 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver et system, der deltog i SemEval-2018 Opgave 1 'Påvirkning i tweets', der forudsiger følelsesmæssige intensiteter. Vi bruger Group LSTM med en opmærksomhedsmodel og overfører læring med sentimentklassificeringsdata som kildedata (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). En overførselsmodellstruktur består af et kildedæne og et måldomæne. Derudover prøver vi en ny dropout, der anvendes på LSTM'er i Gruppen LSTM. Vores system rangerede på 8. plads ved subaktivitet 1a (følelsesintensitetsregression). Vi viser også forskellige resultater med forskellige arkitekturer i kilde-, mål- og overførselsmodeller.", 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft een systeem dat wordt bezocht in de SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affect in tweets' dat emotionele intensiteiten voorspelt. We gebruiken Group LSTM met een aandachtsmodel en brengen leren over met sentimentclassificatiegegevens als brongegevens (SemEval 2017 Taak 4a). Een transfermodel structuur bestaat uit een brondomein en een doeldomein. Daarnaast proberen we een nieuwe dropout die wordt toegepast op LSTMs in de Groep LSTM. Ons systeem scoorde 8e op de subtaak 1a (emotie intensiteit regressie). We tonen ook verschillende resultaten met verschillende architecturen in de bron-, doel- en transfermodellen.", 'de': "Dieser Beitrag beschreibt ein System, das im SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affekt in Tweets' besucht wurde, das emotionale Intensitäten vorhersagt. Wir nutzen Group LSTM mit Aufmerksamkeitsmodell und übertragen das Lernen mit Sentiment Klassifikationsdaten als Quelldaten (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Eine Transfermodellstruktur besteht aus einer Quell- und einer Zieldomäne. Zusätzlich versuchen wir einen neuen Abbruch, der auf LSTMs in der Gruppe LSTM angewendet wird. Unser System belegte den achten Platz bei der Teilaufgabe 1a (Emotionsintensitätsregression). Wir zeigen auch verschiedene Ergebnisse mit unterschiedlichen Architekturen im Quell-, Ziel- und Transfermodell.", 'ko': "본고는SemEval-18퀘스트1'트위터의 감정'에 참여한 시스템을 묘사하고 이 시스템은 정서의 강도를 예측한다.우리는 주의 모형이 있는 그룹 LSTM과 정서 분류 데이터가 있는 전이 학습을 원본 데이터(SemEval 2017 임무 4a)로 사용한다.전송 모델 구조는 원역과 목표역으로 구성된다.그 밖에 우리는 LSTM 그룹의 LSTM에 적용되는 새로운 중퇴를 시도했다.우리의 시스템은 하위 임무 1a(정서 강도 회귀)에서 8위에 랭크되어 있다.우리는 또한 원본, 목표와 전송 모델에서 서로 다른 체계 구조의 각종 결과를 보여 주었다.", 'sw': "This paper describes a system attended in the SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affect in tweets' that predicts emotional intensities.  Tunatumia Kundi la LSTM kwa mfano wa ufuatiliaji na kuhamisha kujifunza kwa taarifa za usambazaji wa hisia kama taarifa za vyanzo (SemEval 2017 kazi 4a). Muundo wa uhamishaji unajumuisha sehemu ya chanzo na sehemu ya lengo. Zaidi ya hayo, tunajaribu kutolewa kwa vifaa vipya vinavyotumika kwa LSTM katika kundi la LSTM. Mfumo wetu ulikuwa na umri wa nane katika kazi ya subira ya 1a (ukatili wa hisia). We also show various results with different architectures in the source, target and transfer models.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم\u200cای را توصیف می\u200cکند که در تابع ۱ «تاثیر در توئیت» حاضر می\u200cشوند که در تابع\u200cهای احساساتی پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند. ما از گروه LSTM با یک مدل توجه استفاده می کنیم و یادگیری را با اطلاعات تجارت احساسات به عنوان اطلاعات منبع استفاده می کنیم. ساختار مدل انتقال از یک دامین منبع و یک دامین هدف است. به اضافه، ما سعی می کنیم که به LSTMs در گروه LSTM تغییر دهیم. سیستم ما 8 درجه در پایین سوال 1a (افسردگی شدت احساسات) درجه گرفته است. ما همچنین نتایج مختلف را با معماری مختلف در مدل منبع، هدف و انتقال نشان می دهیم.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval-2018 Görevinde 'Tweets 1-de janlaşyk etkinlik' sistemini tanaýar. Biz Grup LSTM üns model bilen duýgulanmasy klasifikasyon maglumaty bir çeşme maglumaty bilen ullanýarys (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Transfer nusgasy bir çeşme domenyň we maksady domenyň bar. Eger-de, biz LSTM'de Ululykdaky LSTM'lere uygulanan täze taýdan çykarmagy synanyşýarys. Biziň sistemamyz 1a asty soragda 8-nji derejä geldi. Biz hem çeşitli netijeleri meýdança arhitektura görkezip çeşmelerde, maksadyň we transferler nusgalarynda görkezip berýäris.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe 'n stelsel wat in die SemEval-2018 taak 1 'Afteken in tweets' aanvaar emosionele intensiteit. Ons gebruik groep LSTM met 'n aandag model en oordrag leer met sentiment klassifikasie data as 'n bron data (SemEval 2017 taak 4a). 'n Oordragmodel struktuur bestaan van' n bron domein en' n doel domein. Ons probeer 'n nuwe dropout wat aan LSTMs in die Groep LSTM aangepas word. Ons stelsel rangeer 8de by die subvraag 1a (emosie intensiteit regresie). Ons wys ook verskillende resultate met verskillende arkitektuure in die bron, doel en oordragmodele.", 'sq': "Ky dokument përshkruan një sistem të ndjekur në Detyrën SemEval-2018 1 'Afekt në Twitter' që parashikon intensitetet emocionale. Ne përdorim Grupin LSTM me një model vëmendje dhe transferojmë mësimin me të dhënat e klasifikimit të ndjenjave si një burim të dhënash (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Një strukturë e modelit të transferimit përbëhet nga një domeni burimi dhe një domeni objektiv. Additionally, we try a new dropout that is applied to LSTMs in the Group LSTM.  Sistemi ynë u rendit i tetë në nënpyetjen 1a. We also show various results with different architectures in the source, target and transfer models.", 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የስብሰባዊ ጉዳይ በሴምEval-2018 ትዊተሮች ውስጥ የተገኘውን ስርዓት ያሳያል፡፡ ጉባኤን LSTM በመጠየቅ ምሳሌ እና በተማርነው የስሜት classification ዳታ እንደ ምንጭ ዳታ እናስቀዳለን (SemEval 2017 ስራ 4a). ምርጫዎች በተጨማሪም፣ የLSTM ጉባኤ ለLSTM የሚደረገውን አዲስ ውጤት እንሞክራለን፡፡ ስብሰባችን ስምንተኛው በመስኮት 1a (የስብሰባ ድጋፍ) በተለያዩ የመዝገብ ቤት መሠረቶች እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': "This paper describes a system attended in the SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affect in tweets' that predicts emotional intensities.  Մենք օգտագործում ենք LSMT խումբը ուշադրության մոդելի հետ և փոխանցում ենք սովորելը զգացմունքների դասակարգման տվյալներով որպես աղբյուր տվյալներ (SEM 2017-ի հանձնարարություն 4a). Մոդելի փոխանցման կառուցվածքը կազմված է աղբյուրի և նպատակային տիեզերքից: Ավելին, մենք փորձում ենք նոր դուրս գալ, որը կիրառվում է LStms-ի համար LStm-ի խմբում: Մեր համակարգը 8-րդ դասակարգված էր 1a ենթահարցում (զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության վերադառնալը): Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս տարբեր արդյունքներ տարբեր ճարտարապետությունների միջոցով աղբյուրի, նպատակի և փոխանցման մոդելների մեջ:", 'az': 'Bu kağıt, SemEval-2018 Task 1\'nin "Tweets\'in Impact" sistemini təsbit edir ki, duygusal a ğırlıqları tədbir edir. Biz Grupu LSTM\'i gözləmə modeli ilə istifadə edirik və sentiment klasifikasyonu verilən məlumatları mənbə məlumatları olaraq istifadə edirik (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Transfer modeli quruluşu mənbə domeindən və məqsəd domeindən olur. Üstəlik, LSTM qrupdakı LSTMs\'lərə uyğulanmış yeni dəyişiklik çabalayıq. Sistemimiz 1.a (emosiyal şiddətli regresiya) altıda 8-ci dərəcə çəkildi. Biz də müxtəlif sonuçları müxtəlif arhitektarla mənbədə, məqsəd və transfer modellərdə göstəririk.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমভাল-২০১৮ টুইটে অংশগ্রহণ করা একটি সিস্টেম ব্যাখ্যা করেছে যা আবেগের উদ্দেশ্যের ভবিষ্যৎ করেছে। আমরা গ্রুপ এলএসএমএ ব্যবহার করি একটি মনোযোগ মডেল এবং আবেগের ক্লাসাফিকেশন তথ্যের সূত্র তথ্য হিসেবে শিক্ষা প্রদান করি। একটি পরিবর্তন মডেল কাঠামো একটি উৎস ডোমেইন এবং একটি লক্ষ্য ডোমেইন। এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি নতুন ড্রাউটপুট চেষ্টা করি যা এলএসএমএস গ্রুপে এলস্টিএমএস প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। আমাদের সিস্টেম সাবকার্যক্রম ১ এ আটতম (আবেগের শক্তিশালী পুনরাবৃত্তি প্রদান করা)। আমরা উৎস, লক্ষ্য এবং পরিবর্তন মডেলে বিভিন্ন আর্কিটারের ফলাফল দেখাই।', 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang hadir di SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affect in tweets' yang memprediksi intensitas emosional. Kami menggunakan LSTM Grup dengan model perhatian dan transfer belajar dengan data klasifikasi sentimen sebagai data sumber (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). A transfer model structure consists of a source domain and a target domain.  Selain itu, kita mencoba keluar baru yang diterapkan pada LSTM dalam kelompok LSTM. Sistem kita berturut-turut ke-8 di subtask 1a (regresi intensitas emosi). Kami juga menunjukkan berbagai hasil dengan arsitektur yang berbeda di sumber, target dan model transfer.", 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje sistem koji je prisustvovan u zadatku 1 iz polovine Evala-2018 'utjecaj na tweets' koji predviđa emocionalnu intenzitet. Koristimo grupu LSTM sa modelom pažnje i učenjem prijenosa sa podacima klasifikacije sentiment a kao izvorski podaci (zadatak 4a za semiEval 2017). Struktura model a prijenosa se sastoji od izvornog domena i ciljnog domena. Osim toga, pokušavamo novu potisnicu koja se primjenjuje na LSTMs u grupi LSTM. Naš sistem je postavio 8. na podpitanju 1a (regresija emocionalne intenzitete). Također pokazujemo različite rezultate sa različitim arhitekturom u izvoru, ciljevima i modelima prebacivanja.", 'cs': "Tento článek popisuje systém účastnící se SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affect in tweets', který předpovídá emoční intenzity. Používáme skupinový LSTM s modelem pozornosti a jako zdrojová data přenášíme učení s klasifikací sentimentů (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Struktura přenosového modelu se skládá ze zdrojové domény a cílové domény. Kromě toho zkoušíme nový ukončený výstup, který je aplikován na LSTMy ve skupině LSTM. Náš systém byl osmý na podúkolu 1a (regrese intenzity emocí). Také ukazujeme různé výsledky s různými architekturami ve zdrojovém, cílovém a přenosovém modelu.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse SemEval-2018 ülesandes 1 "Mõju säutsudes" osalenud süsteemi, mis prognoosib emotsionaalset intensiivsust. Kasutame rühma LSTM tähelepanu mudeliga ja edastame õppimist sentimentaalse klassifikatsiooni andmetega lähteandmetena (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Ülekandemudeli struktuur koosneb lähtedomeenist ja sihtdomeenist. Lisaks proovime uut väljalangemist, mida rakendatakse LSTMde rühmas. Meie süsteem on alaülesandes 1a (emotsioonide intensiivsuse regressioon) 8. kohal. Samuti näitame erinevate arhitektuuridega tulemusi allika-, siht- ja ülekandemudelites.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval-2018 Task 1 "Affect in tweets" -ohjelmaan osallistunutta järjestelmää, joka ennustaa emotionaalisia intensiteettejä. Käytämme ryhmäLSTM:ää huomiomallilla ja siirrämme oppimista tunteiden luokittelutietojen avulla lähdeaineistona (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). Siirtomallirakenne koostuu lähdeverkkotunnuksesta ja kohdeverkkotunnuksesta. Lisäksi kokeilemme uutta keskeyttämistä, jota sovelletaan LSTM-ryhmän LSTM-ryhmiin. Järjestelmämme sijoittui kahdeksanneksi alatehtävässä 1a (tunteiden intensiteetin regressio). Lisäksi näytämme erilaisia tuloksia eri arkkitehtuureilla lähde-, kohde- ja siirtomalleissa.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu un sistema assistit al SemEval-2018 Task 1 'Affect in tweets' que prediu intensitats emocionals. Utilitzem el grup LSTM amb un model d'atenció i transferim l'aprenentatge amb dades de classificació de sentiments com a dades fonts (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). A transfer model structure consists of a source domain and a target domain.  Additionally, we try a new dropout that is applied to LSTMs in the Group LSTM.  El nostre sistema es va classificar en la 8ª posició a la subpregunta 1a (regressió de l'intensitat emocional). We also show various results with different architectures in the source, target and transfer models.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem, ki se je udeležil prve naloge SemEval-2018 "Vpliv v tweetih", ki napoveduje čustvene intenzivnosti. Skupinski LSTM uporabljamo z modelom pozornosti in prenašamo učenje s podatki o klasifikaciji sentimenta kot izvorni podatki (naloga 4a SemEval 2017). Struktura modela prenosa je sestavljena iz domene vira in ciljne domene. Poleg tega preizkusimo novo opustitev, ki se uporablja za LSTMs v skupini LSTM. Naš sistem se je uvrstil na 8. mesto v podnalogo 1a (regresija intenzivnosti čustev). Prikazujemo tudi različne rezultate z različnimi arhitekturami v modelih vira, cilja in prenosa.', 'ha': "Bu takardan na bayyana wani na'urar da aka halatta a cikin aikin SemEl-2018 Taimar 1 'Affect in Twitter' wanda ke yi bayani ga kashi. Tuna amfani da Group LStM da wani motsi na kiyãye kuma Muke motsa wa zane-zane da tsarin sifati na hisia kamar data na source (SemEl 2017 Taimar 4a). A transfer model structure consists of a source domain and a target domain.  Da haka, Munã jarraba wata sabo da ake amfani da LSSM cikin Group in LSSM. Siyarmu na ranar da 8 a cikin aikin 1a (kashi mai saukarwa). Ko kuma Muke nũna matsalan dabam-dabam da wasu matsayi masu cikin maɓallin komai, da goani da motsi.", 'jv': "Perintah iki rambarang sistem sing ngendalikne ning semiinval-2008 task 1 'AfEffect in Tuts' sing ngerasai ampliwat irungne. We use Group LTT M with an Attribute model and transfer A transfer model architectures are of a source domain and a goal domain. Mungkin, kéné ngewat perintah sing dibutuhke ipun sing aplikasi kanggo LA Sistem awak dhéwé rangoleh tanggal 8 ing panjur 1a (réaksi empresi). Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing sampeyan karo akeh sampeyan karo perusahaan, cilik lan model nggawe", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר מערכת שהשתתפה במשימה 1 "השפעה בטיוויטים" של SemEval-2018 שמחזיקה אינטנסיביות רגשיות. אנחנו משתמשים בקבוצה LSTM עם מודל תשומת לב ולהעביר לימוד עם מידע מסווג רגשות כמידע מקור (SemEval 2017 Task 4a). מבנה מודל העברה מורכב ממקור שטח ומטרה. Additionally, we try a new dropout that is applied to LSTMs in the Group LSTM.  Our system ranked 8th at the subtask 1a (emotion intensity regression).  אנחנו גם מראים תוצאות שונות עם ארכיטקטורות שונות במקור, מטרה ומודלים העברה.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval-2018 དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོར་ཞིང་། ང་ཚོས་ཚོ་ཁག་གི་LSTM་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དང་སྤྱིར་གྱི་ཐད་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་བཤད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། A transfer model structure consists of a source domain and a target domain. ཁྱད་པར། འུ་ཚོས་ཁང་གི་LSTM ནང་གི་LSTMs ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པའི་སྒུལ་སྒྲིག་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ལ་ཚོད་ལྟ་བྱེད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་རྒྱབ་སྤྲོ་༡a(སེམས་ཚོར་ཐག་བཅད་ཀྱིས་འགྲོ་རྩིས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་སྒོ་ཕུང་)ལ་འགྲོ་བཞི ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་འདི་དག་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་དང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་གནས་སྐྱོད་modeལ་མིན་འདུག'}
{'en': 'DeepMiner at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Emotion Intensity Recognition Using Deep Representation Learning', 'ar': 'DeepMiner في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: التعرف على شدة العاطفة باستخدام التعلم العميق بالتمثيل', 'es': 'DeepMiner en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Reconocimiento de la intensidad de las emociones mediante el aprendizaje de representación profunda', 'pt': 'DeepMiner no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Reconhecimento da Intensidade da Emoção Usando Aprendizagem de Representação Profunda', 'fr': "DeepMiner au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Reconnaissance de l'intensité des émotions à l'aide de l'apprentissage profond", 'zh': 'DeepMiner at SemEval-2018 务 1:以深见情', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर DeepMiner: गहरी प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने का उपयोग कर भावना तीव्रता मान्यता', 'ja': 'DeepMiner at SemEval -2018タスク1 ：深層表現学習を使用した感情の強度認識', 'ru': 'DeepMiner на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Распознавание интенсивности эмоций с использованием глубокого репрезентативного обучения', 'ga': 'DeepMiner ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Aithint Déine Mothúcháin ag Úsáid Foghlaim Léirithe Dhomhain', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Αναγνώριση Έντασης Συναισθηματισμού χρησιμοποιώντας τη Μάθηση Βαθιάς Αντιπροσωπείας', 'ka': 'DeepMiner at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Recognition Using Deep Representation Learning', 'hu': 'DeepMiner a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Az érzelmi intenzitás felismerése a mély reprezentációs tanulással', 'kk': 'Дыбыс минері 1- жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында: көңіл түсініктерін түсініп, түсініктерді үйрену', 'it': "DeepMiner a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Riconoscimento dell'intensità emotiva utilizzando l'apprendimento della rappresentazione profonda", 'lt': '„DeepMiner“ – 2018 m. pusmečio vertinimo 1 užduotis: emocinio intensyvumo pripažinimas, naudojant gilaus atstovavimo mokymąsi', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ ഡീപ്മൈന്\u200dറര്\u200d: ആഴത്തിലെ പ്രതിനിധി പഠിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഇമോട്ടിഷന്\u200dറിയുടെ സൂ', 'mk': 'DeepMiner на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Признавање на емоционалната интензитет користејќи учење на длабока претстава', 'mt': 'DeepMiner f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Rikonoxximent ta’ Intensità Emozzjonali bl-Użu ta’ Tagħlim ta’ Rappreżentanza Profonda', 'ms': 'DeepMiner di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Pengenalan Intensiti Emosi Menggunakan Belajar Perwakilan Dalam', 'no': 'DeepMiner ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Førehandsinnstillingsgjenkjenning ved bruk av dyppa representasjonslæring', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Recognition Use Deep Representation Learning', 'pl': 'DeepMiner w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Rozpoznawanie intensywności emocji przy użyciu uczenia się głębokiej reprezentacji', 'ro': 'DeepMiner la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Recunoașterea intensității emoționale folosind învățarea profundă a reprezentării', 'sr': 'DeepMiner na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: prepoznavanje intenziteta emocija korištenje dubokog predstavljanja učenja', 'si': 'DeepMinr at Half-2018 Job 1: Emotion Intensty Knowing Using Deep Picture Training', 'sv': 'DeepMiner pﾃ･ SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Kﾃ､nslointensitetsigenkﾃ､nning med hjﾃ､lp av Deep Representation Learning', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka SemEval-2018', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் ஆழம் மைன்டர் 1: ஆழமான பிரதிநிதி கற்றத்தை பயன்படுத்தி உணர்வு உணர்வு உணர்வு உணர்வு', 'ur': 'عمیق نمایش کی تعلیم کی استعمال کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': 'Eval- 2018 Vazifaning DeepMiner 1: Deep Representation Learni Foydalanish', 'vi': 'Sâu-Miner at SemEvol Task 1: nhận diện về độ mạnh cảm xúc Dùng phát triển sâu học', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Разпознаване на интензивността на емоциите чрез изучаване на дълбоко представителство', 'nl': 'DeepMiner bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Emotieintensiteitsherkenning met behulp van Deep Representation Learning', 'hr': 'DeepMiner na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 1: prepoznavanje intenzitete emocija korištenje učenja dubokog predstavljanja', 'da': 'DeepMiner på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Anerkendelse af følelsesintensitet ved hjælp af dyb repræsentationslæring', 'de': 'DeepMiner bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: EmotionsintensitĂ¤tserkennung mittels Deep Representation Learning', 'id': 'DeepMiner di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Pengetahuan Intensitas Emosi Menggunakan Perwakilan Dalam Belajar', 'ko': 'SemEval-2018의 DeepMiner 퀘스트 1: 심도 표징 학습으로 정서 강도 식별', 'fa': 'عمیق ماینر در نیمه\u200cسال-۲۰۰۸ کار ۱: شناسایی هوشمند احساسات با استفاده از یادگیری نمایش عمیق', 'sw': 'DeepMiner at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Recognition Using Deep Representation Learning', 'af': 'DeepMiner by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: Emosie Intensiteit Herkenning gebruik Deep Representatie Leer', 'tr': 'DeepMiner at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Recognition Using Deep Representation Learning', 'sq': 'DeepMiner në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Recognition Using Deep Representation Learning', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 1: ጥልቅ Representation Learning using Emotion Intensity Recognition', 'hy': 'DeepMiner-ը 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի առաջին խնդիր է. զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության ճանաչելը, օգտագործելով խորը ներկայացման սովորելը', 'az': 'DeepMiner at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Recognition Use Deep Representation Learning', 'bn': '১: গভীর প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে Emotion Intity Recognition', 'bs': 'DeepMiner na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: prepoznavanje intenziteta emocija korištenje dubokog predstavljanja učenja', 'ca': 'DeepMiner a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Recognition of Emotional Intensity Using Deep Representation Learning', 'cs': 'Úkol 1: Rozpoznávání intenzity emocí pomocí hlubokého učení reprezentace', 'et': 'DeepMiner SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Emotsioonide intensiivsuse äratundmine sügava esindusõppe abil', 'fi': 'DeepMiner SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Tunteiden intensiteetin tunnistaminen syvän edustuksen oppimisen avulla', 'jv': 'deep Miner at semiinval-2013 task 1: emuation Intensity Learning Using deep representation Learning', 'sk': 'DeepMiner na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: prepoznavanje intenzivnosti čustev z uporabo učenja globokega predstavništva', 'he': 'DeepMiner ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: זיהוי אינטנסיבות רגשות באמצעות לימוד מייצג עמוק', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'bo': 'DeepMiner at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Emotion Intensity Recognition Using Deep Representation Learning'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a regression system to infer the emotion intensity of a tweet. We develop a multi-aspect feature learning mechanism to capture the most discriminative semantic features of a tweet as well as the emotion information conveyed by each word in it. We combine six types of feature groups : (1) a tweet representation learned by an LSTM deep neural network on the training data, (2) a tweet representation learned by an LSTM network on a large corpus of tweets that contain emotion words (a distant supervision corpus), (3) word embeddings trained on the distant supervision corpus and averaged over all words in a tweet, (4) word and character n-grams, (5) features derived from various sentiment and emotion lexicons, and (6) other hand-crafted features. As part of the word embedding training, we also learn the distributed representations of multi-word expressions (MWEs) and negated forms of words. An SVR regressor is then trained over the full set of features. We evaluate the effectiveness of our ensemble feature sets on the SemEval-2018 Task 1 datasets and achieve a Pearson correlation of 72 % on the task of tweet emotion intensity prediction.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نظام انحدار لاستنتاج شدة الانفعال للتغريدة. نقوم بتطوير آلية تعلم ميزة متعددة الجوانب لالتقاط السمات الدلالية الأكثر تمييزًا للتغريدة بالإضافة إلى معلومات المشاعر التي تنقلها كل كلمة فيها. نحن نجمع ستة أنواع من مجموعات الميزات: (1) تمثيل تغريدة تعلمته شبكة LSTM العصبية العميقة على بيانات التدريب ، (2) تمثيل تغريدة تعلمته شبكة LSTM على مجموعة كبيرة من التغريدات التي تحتوي على كلمات عاطفية (بعيدة مجموعة الإشراف) ، (3) حفلات الزفاف المدربة على مجموعة الإشراف البعيدة ومتوسطها على جميع الكلمات في تغريدة ، (4) كلمة وحرف n-grams ، (5) ميزات مشتقة من معاجم المشاعر والعاطفة المختلفة ، و (6) ميزات أخرى مصنوعة يدويًا. كجزء من تدريب تضمين الكلمة ، نتعلم أيضًا التمثيلات الموزعة للتعبيرات متعددة الكلمات (MWEs) وأشكال الكلمات المنفية. ثم يتم تدريب عاكس SVR على مجموعة كاملة من الميزات. نقوم بتقييم فعالية مجموعات ميزات مجموعتنا في مجموعات بيانات SemEval-2018 Task 1 ونحقق ارتباط Pearson بنسبة 72٪ في مهمة التنبؤ بشدة العاطفة على Twitter.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um sistema de regressão para inferir a intensidade da emoção de um tweet. Desenvolvemos um mecanismo de aprendizado de recursos de vários aspectos para capturar os recursos semânticos mais discriminativos de um tweet, bem como as informações de emoção transmitidas por cada palavra nele. Combinamos seis tipos de grupos de recursos: (1) uma representação de tweet aprendida por uma rede neural profunda LSTM nos dados de treinamento, (2) uma representação de tweet aprendida por uma rede LSTM em um grande corpus de tweets que contêm palavras de emoção (um distante corpus de supervisão), (3) incorporações de palavras treinadas no corpus de supervisão distante e calculada a média de todas as palavras em um tweet, (4) n-grams de palavras e caracteres, (5) características derivadas de vários léxicos de sentimentos e emoções e (6) outros recursos artesanais. Como parte do treinamento de incorporação de palavras, também aprendemos as representações distribuídas de expressões com várias palavras (MWEs) e formas negadas de palavras. Um regressor SVR é então treinado sobre o conjunto completo de recursos. Avaliamos a eficácia de nossos conjuntos de recursos de conjunto nos conjuntos de dados da Tarefa 1 do SemEval-2018 e alcançamos uma correlação de Pearson de 72% na tarefa de previsão da intensidade da emoção do tweet.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons un système de régression pour déduire l'intensité émotionnelle d'un tweet. Nous développons un mécanisme d'apprentissage de fonctionnalités multi-aspects pour capturer les caractéristiques sémantiques les plus discriminantes d'un tweet ainsi que les informations émotionnelles véhiculées par chaque mot qu'il contient. Nous combinons six types de groupes de fonctionnalités\xa0: (1) une représentation de tweet apprise par un réseau de neurones profond LSTM sur les données d'entraînement, (2) une représentation de tweet apprise par un réseau LSTM sur un grand corpus de tweets contenant des mots d'émotion (un corpus de supervision distant), (3) des intégrations de mots entraînées à distance corpus de supervision et moyenné sur tous les mots d'un tweet, (4) n-grammes de mots et de caractères, (5) caractéristiques dérivées de divers lexiques de sentiments et d'émotions, et (6) autres caractéristiques artisanales. Dans le cadre de la formation à l'intégration de mots, nous apprenons également les représentations distribuées des expressions multi-mots (MWE) et des formes de mots inversées. Un régresseur SVR est ensuite entraîné sur l'ensemble des fonctionnalités. Nous évaluons l'efficacité de nos ensembles de fonctionnalités d'ensemble sur les ensembles de données SemeVal-2018 Task 1 et obtenons une corrélation de Pearson de 72\xa0% sur la tâche de prédiction de l'intensité des émotions des tweets.", 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos un sistema de regresión para inferir la intensidad de la emoción de un tuit. Desarrollamos un mecanismo de aprendizaje de funciones multiaspecto para capturar las características semánticas más discriminatorias de un tuit, así como la información de emociones que transmite cada palabra en él. Combinamos seis tipos de grupos de características: (1) una representación de tuits aprendida por una red neuronal profunda LSTM en los datos de entrenamiento, (2) una representación de tuits aprendida por una red LSTM en un gran corpus de tuits que contienen palabras de emoción (un corpus de supervisión distante), (3) incrustaciones de palabras entrenadas en lo lejano corpus de supervisión y promediado de todas las palabras de un tuit, (4) n-gramas de palabras y caracteres, (5) características derivadas de varios léxicos de sentimientos y emociones, y (6) otras características hechas a mano. Como parte de la capacitación sobre incorporación de palabras, también aprendemos las representaciones distribuidas de expresiones de varias palabras (MWE) y las formas negadas de palabras. A continuación, se entrena a un regresor SVR sobre el conjunto completo de funciones. Evaluamos la eficacia de nuestros conjuntos de características de conjunto en los conjuntos de datos de la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018 y logramos una correlación de Pearson del 72% en la tarea de predicción de la intensidad de las emociones de los tweets.', 'ja': '本稿では、ツイートの感情の強さを推測する回帰システムを提案する。 私たちは、ツイートの最も差別的な意味論的特徴と、その中の各単語によって伝えられる感情情報を取り込むための多面的な特徴学習メカニズムを開発します。 私たちは、次の6種類の特徴グループを組み合わせます。（ 1 ）トレーニングデータ上のLSTMディープニューラルネットワークによって学習されたツイート表現、（ 2 ）感情の単語（遠隔監督コーパス）を含むツイートの大規模コーパス上のLSTMネットワークによって学習されたツイート表現、（ 3 ）遠隔監督コーパスでトレーニングされ、ツイート内のすべての単語の平均化された単語埋め込み、（ 4 ）単語と文字のn - gram、（ 5 ）さまざまな感情と感情の辞書に由来する特徴、および（ 6 ）その他の手作りの特徴。 単語埋め込みトレーニングの一環として、多言語表現（ MWE ）と否定形の単語の分散表現も学びます。 次に、SVRリグレッサーは、機能のフルセットでトレーニングされます。 私たちは、SemEval -2018タスク1データセットのアンサンブル機能セットの有効性を評価し、ツイート感情強度予測のタスクで72%のピアソン相関を達成します。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक ट्वीट की भावना तीव्रता का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक प्रतिगमन प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम एक ट्वीट की सबसे भेदभावपूर्ण शब्दार्थ विशेषताओं के साथ-साथ इसमें प्रत्येक शब्द द्वारा व्यक्त की गई भावनाओं की जानकारी को कैप्चर करने के लिए एक बहु-पहलू सुविधा सीखने के तंत्र को विकसित करते हैं। हम छह प्रकार के फीचर समूहों को जोड़ते हैं: (1) प्रशिक्षण डेटा पर एक एलएसटीएम गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क द्वारा सीखा गया एक ट्वीट प्रतिनिधित्व, (2) ट्वीट्स के एक बड़े कॉर्पस पर एक एलएसटीएम नेटवर्क द्वारा सीखा गया एक ट्वीट प्रतिनिधित्व जिसमें भावना शब्द (एक दूर के पर्यवेक्षण कॉर्पस) होते हैं, (3) शब्द एम्बेडिंग दूर के पर्यवेक्षण कॉर्पस पर प्रशिक्षित होते हैं और एक ट्वीट में सभी शब्दों पर औसत होते हैं,  (4) शब्द और चरित्र एन-ग्राम, (5) विभिन्न भावनाओं और भावनाओं कोशों से व्युत्पन्न विशेषताएं, और (6) अन्य हाथ से तैयार की गई विशेषताएं। एम्बेडिंग प्रशिक्षण शब्द के हिस्से के रूप में, हम बहु-शब्द अभिव्यक्तियों (MWEs) और शब्दों के नकारे गए रूपों के वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व भी सीखते हैं। एक SVR regressor तो सुविधाओं के पूरे सेट पर प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है. हम SemEval-2018 टास्क 1 डेटासेट पर हमारे पहनावा सुविधा सेट की प्रभावशीलता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और ट्वीट भावना तीव्रता भविष्यवाणी के कार्य पर 72% के पियर्सन सहसंबंध को प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы предлагаем систему регрессии, чтобы вывести интенсивность эмоций твита. Мы разрабатываем многоаспектный механизм обучения признакам, чтобы охватить наиболее дискриминационные семантические признаки твита, а также эмоциональную информацию, передаваемую каждым словом в нем. Мы объединяем шесть типов групп признаков: (1) представление твитов, изученное глубокой нейронной сетью LSTM на обучающих данных, (2) представление твитов, изученное сетью LSTM на большом корпусе твитов, которые содержат эмоциональные слова (корпус дистанционного наблюдения), (3) вложения слов, обученные на корпусе дистанционного наблюдения и усредненные по всем словам в твите, (4) n-граммы слов и символов, (5) признаки, полученные из различных лексиконов чувств и эмоций, и (6) другие ручные функции. В рамках обучения внедрению слов мы также изучаем распределенные представления многословных выражений (MWE) и отвергнутых форм слов. Затем регрессор СВР обучается всему набору функций. Мы оцениваем эффективность наших наборов признаков ансамбля на наборах данных задачи 1 SemEval-2018 и достигаем корреляции Пирсона 72% на задаче прогнозирования интенсивности эмоций в твите.', 'zh': '本文中,发一归统以推推文情。 多发一机,以获推文之最鉴别性者语义及单词传情信息。 合六科:(1)LSTM深度神经网络学数之推文,(2)LSTM网络含情单词(远程监语料库)之大推文语料库上学之推文,(3)远程监语料库之词,均之推文单词。  (4)单词符n-gram,(5)衍情词典,及(6)工为之。 词嵌训练,犹学多词表达式(MWE)单词之分布式。 然后训练 SVR 回归器整组功能。 SemEval-2018 Task 1数集上评集之有效性,推文情度之72%Pearson相关性。', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid córas cúlchéimnithe chun déine na mothúchán a bhaineann le tweet a fháil. Forbróimid meicníocht ilghnéitheach foghlama gné chun na gnéithe séimeantacha is idirdhealaitheacha de thvuít a ghabháil chomh maith leis an bhfaisnéis mothúcháin a chuireann gach focal ann. Cuirimid le chéile sé chineál sainghrúpaí: (1) léiriú tweet arna fhoghlaim ag líonra néaránach domhain LSTM ar na sonraí oiliúna, (2) léiriú tweet a d'fhoghlaim líonra LSTM ar chorpas mór tweets ina bhfuil focail mhothúcháin (a i bhfad i gcéin. corpas maoirseachta), (3) leabú focal oilte ar an gcorpas maoirseachta i bhfad i gcéin agus meánaithe thar gach focal i dtweet, (4) focal agus carachtar n-gram, (5) gnéithe a dhíorthaítear ó foclóirí éagsúla meon agus mothúcháin, agus (6) gnéithe eile de dhéantús an duine. Mar chuid den oiliúint um leabú focal, foghlaimímid freisin na huiríll dáilte ar nathanna cainte ilfhoclacha (MWEanna) agus foirmeacha diúltaithe focal. Cuirtear oiliúint ar aischéimneoir SVR ansin thar an tsraith iomlán gnéithe. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar éifeachtacht ár ngné-thacair ensemble ar thacair thacair Tasc 1 SemEval-2018 agus bainimid amach comhghaol Pearson de 72% ar an tasc a bhaineann le déine mothúcháin tweet a thuar.", 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy regressziós rendszert javasolunk egy tweet érzelmi intenzitásának következtetésére. Kifejlesztünk egy többszempontú funkciós tanulási mechanizmust, amely rögzíti a tweet legdiszkriminatívabb szemantikai jellemzőit, valamint az egyes szavak által közvetített érzelmi információkat. Hat típusú funkciócsoportot kombinálunk: (1) egy LSTM mélyidegi hálózat által az edzési adatokon tanult tweet reprezentáció, (2) egy LSTM hálózat által tanult tweet reprezentáció egy nagy tweet-korpuszon, amely érzelmi szavakat tartalmaz (távoli felügyeleti korpusz), (3) szóbeágyazások a távoli felügyeleti korpuszon képzett és egy tweet összes szavára átlagosított, (4) szó és karakter n-gramm, (5) különböző érzelmi és érzelmi lexikonokból származó jellemzők, és (6) egyéb kézzel készített jellemzők. A szóbeágyazás képzés részeként megtanuljuk a többszós kifejezések (MWE) és a negatív szavak elosztott reprezentációit is. Ezután egy SVR regresszort képeznek a funkciók teljes készletére. A SemEval-2018 Task 1 adatkészleteken értékeljük az együttes funkciókészletek hatékonyságát, és 72%-os Pearson korrelációt érünk el a tweet érzelmi intenzitásának előrejelzése során.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα παλινδρόμησης για να συμπεράνουμε την ένταση των συναισθημάτων ενός tweet. Αναπτύσσουμε έναν μηχανισμό εκμάθησης πολλαπλών χαρακτηριστικών για να συλλάβουμε τα πιο διακριτικά σημασιολογικά χαρακτηριστικά ενός tweet καθώς και τις πληροφορίες συναισθημάτων που μεταδίδει κάθε λέξη σε αυτό. Συνδυάζουμε έξι τύπους ομάδων χαρακτηριστικών: (1) μια αναπαράσταση tweets που μαθαίνεται από ένα βαθύ νευρωνικό δίκτυο LSTM στα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης, (2) μια αναπαράσταση tweets που μαθαίνεται από ένα δίκτυο LSTM σε ένα μεγάλο σώμα tweets που περιέχουν λέξεις συναισθημάτων (ένα μακρινό σώμα επίβλεψης), (3) ενσωμάτωση λέξεων εκπαιδευμένες στο μακρινό σώμα επίβλεψης και μετρημένες σε όλες τις λέξεις σε ένα tweet, (4) γραμμάτια λέξης και χαρακτήρων, (5) χαρακτηριστικά που προέρχονται από διάφορα λεξικά συναισθημάτων και συναισθημάτων και (6) άλλα χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά. Στο πλαίσιο της εκπαίδευσης ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, μαθαίνουμε επίσης τις κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις των πολυλέξεων εκφράσεων και των αρνητικών μορφών λέξεων. Στη συνέχεια, ένας αναδρομέας εκπαιδεύεται σε όλο το σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών. Αξιολογούμε την αποτελεσματικότητα των συνόλων χαρακτηριστικών μας στα σύνολα δεδομένων και επιτυγχάνουμε συσχέτιση 72% Pearson με το έργο της πρόβλεψης έντασης συναισθημάτων tweet.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ რეგრესის სისტემის მიზეზება, რომელიც აღმოჩენა ტევიტის ემოციონის ინტენსიტი. ჩვენ განვითარებთ მრავალ აპექტიკური განსწავლების მექანსი, რომელიც გავაკეთებთ tweet-ის ყველაზე დისკრიმინაციური სმენტიკური განსწავლებები, და ემოციონის ინფორმაცია, რომელიც ყოველ ჩვენ შვიდი ტიპის ფუნქციების ჯგუფები შემყვებით: (1) ტევიტის რესპეცენტაცია, რომელიც LSTM დიდი ნეიროლური ქსელის გასწავლია განაკეთებული მონაცემებზე, (2) ტევიტის რესპეცენტაცია, რომელიც LSTM ქსელის დიდი კორპუსში გასწავლია, რომელიც ემოციოლური სიტყვები Name როგორც სიტყვების ნაწილი, ჩვენ ასევე ვისწავლეთ მრავალური სიტყვების გამოსახულებების გაყოფილი გამოსახულებების (MWEs) და მინდვირებული სიტყვების ფორმების. Name ჩვენ გავამუშავებთ ჩვენი ინსენბლის ფუნქციის ეფექტიურობას SemEval-2018 მონაცემების 1 მონაცემების კოლექტის კოლექციაში და მივიღებთ პერჟონის 72% კოლექციაში გავამუშავებთ გავამ', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo un sistema di regressione per dedurre l'intensità emotiva di un tweet. Sviluppiamo un meccanismo di apprendimento multi-aspetto per catturare le caratteristiche semantiche più discriminatorie di un tweet e le informazioni emozionali trasmesse da ogni parola in esso. Combiniamo sei tipi di gruppi di funzionalità: (1) una rappresentazione di tweet appresa da una rete neurale profonda LSTM sui dati di allenamento, (2) una rappresentazione di tweet appresa da una rete LSTM su un grande corpus di tweet che contengono parole emotive (un corpus di supervisione distante), (3) incorporazioni di parole addestrate sul corpus di supervisione distante e mediate su tutte le parole di un tweet, (4) parole e caratteri n-grammi, (5) caratteristiche derivate da vari lessici sentimentali ed emotivi, e (6) altre caratteristiche artigianali. Come parte della formazione sull'embedding delle parole, impariamo anche le rappresentazioni distribuite delle espressioni multi-parola (MWE) e delle forme negate di parole. Un regressore SVR viene quindi addestrato su tutta la serie di funzionalità. Valutiamo l'efficacia dei nostri insiemi di funzionalità sui dataset SemEval-2018 Task 1 e raggiungiamo una correlazione Pearson del 72% sul compito di previsione dell'intensità emotiva dei tweet.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome regresijos sistemą, kad būtų galima daryti išvadą apie emocinio tweeto intensyvumą. Mes sukuriame įvairių aspektų savybių mokymosi mechanizmą, kuris apimtų labiausiai diskriminuojančias semantines tweeto savybes ir emocinę informaciją, perduotą kiekvienu jame esančiu žodžiu. Sujungiame šešių tipų savybių grupes: 1) nuotolinio stebėjimo korpuso žinių apie mokymo duomenis iš LSTM gilaus nervų tinklo įgytą Twitter atstovavimą, 2) nuotolinio stebėjimo korpuso žinių apie LSTM tinklą žinių apie Twitter atstovavimą dideliame Twitter korpuse, kuriame yra emocinių žodžių (nuotolinio stebėjimo korpuso), 3) nuotolinio stebėjimo korpuso įgytas žodžių įdėjimas ir kurio vidurkis yra didesnis už visus Twitter žodžius, (4) žodis ir simbolis n-gramai, (5) savybės, gautos iš įvairių jausmų ir emocijų leksikonų, ir (6) kitos rankiniu būdu pagamintos savybės. Kaip žodžio įtraukimo mokymo dalis mes taip pat mokome paskirstytus daugiakalbių išraiškų (MWEs) ir neigiamų formų žodžius. VVR regresorius apmokomas visais bruožais. Vertiname mūsų komplekso charakteristikų rinkinių veiksmingumą pagal 1 uždavinio „SemEval-2018“ duomenų rinkinius ir siekiame 72 proc. Pearson koreliacijos tweeto emocijų intensyvumo prognozės uždaviniu.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз регрессия жүйесіне tweet көпшілігінің эмоциялық көпшілігін көмектесу үшін қолданамыз. Біз бірнеше аспекті оқыту механизмін жасап, tweet- тың ең дискриминациялық семантикалық қасиеттерін, және оның әрбір сөзінен берілген емоциялық мәліметтерін түсіру үшін жасаймыз. Біз алты түрлі мүмкіндік топтарды біріктіреміз: (1) LSTM терең невраллық желінде үйренген тейттерді көрсету, 2) LSTM желінің емоциялық сөздерді (қашықтағы контрол корпус), 3) үлкен қашықтағы контрол корпус бойынша үйренген сөздерді біріктіріп, барлық сөздерді жасау үлкен тейттер кор (4) n- грамм сөз мен таңбалар, (5) әртүрлі сезімдер мен эмоциялық лексикондардан шығарылған мүмкіндіктері және (6) басқа қол құрылған мүмкіндіктері. Біз көп сөз өрнектерін (MWEs) және сөздерді келтірген түрін үйренеміз. SVR регрессоры кейін толық қасиеттер жиынына ауыстырылады. Біз осындай қасиеттеріміздің эффективдігін бағалап, 1- жарты тапсырма 1- тапсырма деректер бағдарламасында біз бағалаймыз және Персон эмоциялық қасиеттердің тапсырмасының 72% көмегімен түсіндір', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan sistem regresi untuk menyimpulkan intensiti emosi tweet. We develop a multi-aspect feature learning mechanism to capture the most discriminative semantic features of a tweet as well as the emotion information conveyed by each word in it.  Kami menggabungkan enam jenis kumpulan ciri: (1) mewakili tweet yang dipelajari oleh rangkaian saraf dalam LSTM pada data latihan, (2) mewakili tweet yang dipelajari oleh rangkaian LSTM pada rangkaian besar tweet yang mengandungi perkataan emosi (korpus pengawasan jauh), (3) penyembedding perkataan yang dilatih pada korpus pengawasan jauh dan berrata-rata atas semua perkataan dalam tweet, (4) perkataan dan aksara n-gram, (5) ciri-ciri yang berasal dari pelbagai leksikon perasaan dan emosi, dan (6) ciri-ciri lain yang dibuat tangan. Sebagai sebahagian dari latihan penyembedding perkataan, kita juga belajar perwakilan yang disebarkan bagi ungkapan berbilang perkataan (MWEs) dan bentuk perkataan yang dibatalkan. Penyegerak SVR kemudian dilatih atas set lengkap ciri- ciri. Kami menilai kegunaan set fitur ensemble kami pada set data SemEval-2018 Task 1 dan mencapai korelasi Pearson 72% pada tugas meramalkan intensiti emosi tweet.', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu sistema ta’ rigressjoni biex niinferu l-intensità emozzjonali ta’ tweet. Aħna niżviluppaw mekkaniżmu ta' tagħlim ta' karatteristiċi b'diversi aspetti biex inqabdu l-karatteristiċi semantiċi l-aktar diskriminatorji ta' tweet kif ukoll l-informazzjoni emozzjonali li tgħaddi minn kull kelma fiha. Aħna ngħaqdu sitt tipi ta’ gruppi ta’ karatteristiċi: (1) rappreżentazzjoni ta’ tweet li titgħallem minn netwerk newrali fond tal-LSTM dwar id-dejta ta’ taħriġ, (2) rappreżentazzjoni ta’ tweet li titgħallem minn netwerk tal-LSTM fuq korpus kbir ta’ tweets li fihom kliem emozzjonali (korpus ta’ superviżjoni distanti), (3) inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem imħarrġa fuq il-korpus ta’ superviżjoni distanti u medja fuq il-kliem kollha f’tweet,  (4) word and character n-grams, (5) features derived from various sentiment and emotion lexicons, and (6) other hand-crafted features.  Bħala parti mill-kelma ta’ taħriġ ta’ inkorporazzjoni, qed nitgħallmu wkoll ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti ta’ espressjonijiet b’ħafna kliem (MWEs) u forom negati ta’ kliem. Imbagħad jitħarreġ regressur SVR fuq is-sett sħiħ ta’ karatteristiċi. Aħna jevalwaw l-effettività tas-settijiet ta’ karatteristiċi tal-ensemble tagħna fuq is-settijiet tad-dejta SemEval-2018 Task 1 u nilħqu korrelazzjoni Pearson ta’ 72% fuq il-kompitu tat-tbassir tal-intensità emozzjonali fuq it-tweet.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, предлагаме регресен систем за да се заклучи емоционалниот интензитет на твитот. Ние развиваме механизам за учење на мултиаспекти за да ги фатиме најдискриминативните семантични карактеристики на твитот, како и емоционалните информации пренесени од секој збор во него. Комбинираме шест видови на групи на карактеристики: (1) претставување на Твитер научено од длабока нервна мрежа на ЛСТМ на податоците за обука, (2) претставување на Твитер научено од страна на мрежа на ЛСТМ на голем корпус на Твитери кои содржат емоционални зборови (оддалечен корпус за надзор), (3) вградувања на зборови обучени на оддалечен корпус за надзор (4) збор и карактер n-грам, (5) карактеристики изведени од различни сентиментални и емоционални лексикони, и (6) други рачно направени карактеристики. As part of the word embedding training, we also learn the distributed representations of multi-word expressions (MWEs) and negated forms of words.  СВР регресор потоа е обучен за целиот сет на карактеристики. Ја проценуваме ефикасноста на нашите сетови на ансембли на податоците од SemEval-2018 Task 1 и постигнуваме корелација на Пирсон од 72 отсто на задачата на предвидување на емоционалниот интензитет на Твитер.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു റിക്രഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമാണ് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നത്, ഒരു ടൂട്ടിയിലെ വികാരത്തിന്റെ ഉള് ഒരു ടൂട്ടിയിലെ ഏറ്റവും വിവേകതയുള്ള സെമാന്റിക്ക് വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നതിനായി പല ഭാഗങ്ങളുടെയും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നാം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d ആറു തരം വിശേഷമായ ഗ്രൂപ്പുകളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു: (1) പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d പഠിച്ച ഒരു ലെസ്റ്റിംഎമിന്റെ ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് പഠിച്ച ടൂട്ട് പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d, (2) ഒരു ലെസ്റ്റിംഎം ന (4) വാക്കും അക്ഷരത്തിനും n- ഗ്രാമും (5) വ്യത്യസ്ത വികാരങ്ങളും, വികാരങ്ങളുടെ ലെക്സിക്ഷനുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൊണ്ടുവന്ന വ്യക്തിത്വങ്ങളും, വ വാക്കിന്റെ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഗമായി നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു പല വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളും (MWEs) വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധി ഒരു SVR റിഗ്രെസ്റ്റര്\u200d പിന്നീട് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 1 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവർത്തിയെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ട്വീറ്റി', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi ein regresjonssystem for å gjere følelsesintensiteten til ein tweet. Vi utviklar ein fleire aspektfunksjonslæringsmekanisme for å henta dei mest diskriminasjonale semantiske funksjonane av ein tweet og emosjonsinformasjonen som vert konvertert av kvar ord i det. Vi kombinerer seks typar funksjonsgrupper: (1) eit tweet- representasjon lært av ein LSTM dyp neuralnettverk på opplæringsdata, (2) eit tweet- representasjon lært av ein LSTM- nettverk på ein stor korpus av tweeter som inneheld emosjonsord (ein distant supervisingskorpus), (3) ord- innbygging trent på den distant supervisingskorpusen og gjennomsnitt over alle ord i ein tweet, Name Som del av ordinnbygging, lærer vi også dei distribuerte representasjonane av fleire ord uttrykk (MWEs) og negativte formar av ord. @ info: status Vi evaluerer effektiviteten av våre ensemble-funksjonen sett på datasettet for semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1 og oppnår ein Pearson-korrelasjon av 72 % på oppgåva av tweet-emosjonsintensitet-forventing.', 'pl': 'W artykule proponujemy system regresji, aby wnioskować intensywność emocji tweeta. Opracowujemy wieloaspektowy mechanizm uczenia się funkcji, aby uchwycić najbardziej dyskryminacyjne cechy semantyczne tweeta, a także informacje o emocjach przekazywane przez każde słowo w nim. Łączymy sześć rodzajów grup funkcjonalnych: (1) reprezentację tweeta nauczoną przez głęboką sieć neuronową LSTM na danych treningowych, (2) reprezentację tweeta nauczoną przez sieć LSTM na dużym korpusie tweetów zawierających słowa emocji (odległy korpus nadzoru), (3) osadzenia słów trenowane na korpusie nadzoru odległego i uśrednione na wszystkich słowach w tweecie, (4) n-gramy słowa i znaków, (5) cechy pochodzące z różnych leksykonów sentymentów i emocji oraz (6) inne ręcznie wykonane cechy. W ramach szkolenia osadzania słów uczymy się również rozproszonych reprezentacji wyrażeń wielowłowych (MWE) i negowanych form słów. Regressor SVR jest następnie przeszkolony w pełnym zestawie funkcji. Oceniamy skuteczność zestawów funkcji zespołu na zbiorach danych SemEval-2018 Task 1 i osiągamy korelację Pearsona 72% w zadaniu predykcji intensywności tweeta.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem un sistem de regresie pentru a deduce intensitatea emoțională a unui tweet. Dezvoltăm un mecanism de învățare multi-aspect pentru a capta cele mai discriminatorii caracteristici semantice ale unui tweet, precum și informațiile emoționale transmise de fiecare cuvânt din el. Combinăm șase tipuri de grupuri de caracteristici: (1) o reprezentare tweet învățată de o rețea neuronală profundă LSTM pe datele de antrenament, (2) o reprezentare tweet învățată de o rețea LSTM pe un corpus mare de tweet care conțin cuvinte emoționale (un corpus de supraveghere la distanță), (3) încorporări de cuvinte instruite pe corpul de supraveghere la distanță și calculate pe toate cuvintele dintr-un tweet, (4) cuvinte și caractere n-grame, (5) caracteristici derivate din diferite lexicoane sentimentale și emoții și (6) alte caracteristici lucrate manual. Ca parte a instruirii de încorporare a cuvântului, învățăm, de asemenea, reprezentările distribuite ale expresiilor multi-cuvânt (MWE) și formele negate de cuvinte. Un regresor SVR este apoi instruit pe întregul set de caracteristici. Evaluăm eficacitatea seturilor noastre de caracteristici de ansamblu pe seturile de date SemEval-2018 Task 1 și obținem o corelație Pearson de 72% în sarcina de predicție a intensității emoțiilor tweet.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид tweet-ын сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчирхийллийг бууруулахын тулд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн системийг суурилуулдаг. Бид олон талаар суралцах механизмийг хөгжүүлдэг. Твиттийн хамгийн тархалтын шинжлэх ухааны төлөвлөгөө, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдээллийг түүний үг бүрт авч ирсэн. Бид зургаан төрлийн шинжлэх ухааны бүлгүүдийг нэгтгэдэг: (1) Сургуулийн мэдээллийн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээний LSTM суралцаж сурсан tweet илэрхийлэл, (2) сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үгийг (хол даяарлын корпус), (3) хол даяарлын корпус дээр суралцаж, бүх үгийг tweet дээр дундаж авсан tweet дээр суралцаж, (4) n-грамм үг, харин дүрс, (5) өөр өөр сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөлөөс үүсгэдэг болон (6) бусад гар бүтээгдэхүүнүүд. Бид олон үгийн илэрхийлэл (MWEs) болон сөрөг хэлбэрүүдийн хуваагдсан илэрхийлэл суралцаж байна. Ингээд SVR репрессор бүрэн харилцаа дээр суралцагддаг. Бид SemEval-2018 Task 1 өгөгдлийн сангийн бүтээгдэхүүний үр дүнтэй байдлыг баталж, Персон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчирхэг байдлын даалгаварын 72% холбоотой байдлыг тайлбарлаж байна.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo sistem regresije da zarazi emocionalnu intenzitet tweet a. Razvijamo mehanizam učenja više aspekta kako bi uhvatili najdiskriminirajuće semantičke karakteristike tweet a, kao i emocionalne informacije koje su prijavljene svakom rečima u njemu. Kombinujemo šest vrsta grupa karakteristika: (1) predstavljanje tweet a koje je naučila LSTM duboka neuralna mreža na podacima obuke, (2) predstavljanje tweeta koje je naučila LSTM mreža na velikom korpusu tweeta koje sadrže emocionalne reči (korpus daljinog nadzora), (3) uključivanje reči koje su obučene na korpusu daljinog nadzora i prosječavanje svih reči u tweetu, (4) reč i karakter n-grama, 5) karakteristika iz različitih sentimentalnih i emocionalnih leksiona i (6) drugih karakteristika koje su napravljene rukama. Kao deo treninga reči uključujući, takođe naučimo raspodjeljene predstave višeriječnih izraza (MWEs) i negativne oblike reči. SVR regressor je onda obučen preko punog seta karakteristika. Procjenjujemo učinkovitost naših osnovnih karakteristika na setovima podataka za pola Evala-2018 i ostvarimo korelaciju Pearson a od 72% na zadatku predviđanja emocionalne intenzitete na tweet-u.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා ට්විට් එකේ හැඟීමක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරගන්න. අපි විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ අපි සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ කණ්ඩායම් හතර වර්ගයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා: (1) LSTM ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ ඉගෙන ගත්ත තුරු සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණයක්, (2) LSTM ජාලයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්ත තුරු ට්වීට් වර්ගයක් ලොකු කොර (4) වචනය සහ අක්ෂර n-gram, (5) අක්ෂර වර්ණය සහ හ හැඟීමත් ලෙක්සිකන්ස් වලින් පිළිගත්ත අක්ෂර වර්ණය, සහ (6) අනිත් අත් අත් අ අපි වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ කොටසක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා වචනය වගේ වචනය වගේ වචනය වගේ වචන @ info: status අපි අපේ සැම්බල් විශේෂතාවගේ පරීක්ෂණත්වය අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා සම්බල්ල-2018 වැඩසටහන් 1 දත්ත සටහන් සඳහා පියර්සන් සම්බන්ධතාවක් 72% විශේෂය', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa nidaam dib u celinta si aan u ciqaabno koritaanka fikrada ee tweetka. Waxaynu horumarinaa meymisyo barashada si aan u qabsado noocyada kala takooriska badan iyo macluumaadka fikrada oo ku qoran hadal walba. Waxaan ku soo ururinaa lix nooc oo gaar ah: (1) noocyo ah oo la barto shabakad aad u dheer ee LSTM oo ku qoran taariikhda waxbarashada, (2) shabakadda LSTM oo ku qoran shabakad aad u weyn oo twitter ah oo ku qoran hadal aad u yaqaan (koroos fog supervision), (3) hadal macluumaad lagu baray xarunta ilaalinta fog iyo average ka badan dhammaan erayada oo Tweet ah, (4) Hadal iyo xaraf n-gram, (5) waxyaabaha laga soo saaray xisaabo kala duduwan iyo fikrada, iyo (6) tayooyin kale oo gacanta ku shaqeeya. Sida qeyb ka mid ah hadalka waxbarashada ku qoran, waxaynu barnaa noocyada kala qaybsan ee hadal badan (MWEs) iyo noocyo diidmo ah. Rugta SVR waxaa lagu tababariyaa noocyo oo dhan. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa waxyaabaha ku saabsan tababarada shaqada ee SemEval-2018, waxaynu gaadhaynaa garsoorida Pearson oo ku xiran 72% shaqo ku saabsan waxyaabaha la sii sheego fikrada Tweetka.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett regressionssystem för att härleda känslointensiteten i en tweet. Vi utvecklar en flerdimensionell inlärningsmekanism för att fånga de mest diskriminerande semantiska funktionerna i en tweet samt den känsloinformation som förmedlas av varje ord i den. Vi kombinerar sex typer av funktionsgrupper: (1) en tweetpresentation som lärts av ett LSTM djupt neuralt nätverk på träningsdata, (2) en tweetpresentation som lärts av ett LSTM-nätverk på en stor samling tweets som innehåller känsloord (en avlägsen övervakningskorpus), (3) ordinbäddningar som tränats på avlägsen övervakning korpus och genomsnittligt över alla ord i en tweet, (4) ord och tecken n-gram, (5) egenskaper som härrör från olika sentiment- och känslolexikon, och (6) andra handgjorda funktioner. Som en del av utbildningen om inbäddning av ord lär vi oss också de distribuerade representationerna av flerordsuttryk (MWE) och förnekade ordformer. En SVR regressor tränas sedan över hela uppsättningen funktioner. Vi utvärderar effektiviteten av våra ensemblefunktioner på SemEval-2018 Task 1 datauppsättningar och uppnår en Pearson korrelation på 72% på uppgiften att tweet emotion intensity prediction.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு திரும்பச் செய்யும் அமைப்பை தொடர்பு கொள்ள முறைமையில் ஒரு தொடர்பு கொள்ளும்  மிகவும் வித்தியாசமான பெம்மென்சிக் குணங்களைப் பிடித்துக் கொள்ள பல பாகங்களின் குணங்களை நாம் உருவாக்குகிறோம் ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையு நாம் ஆறு வகையான குழுக்களை ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறோம்: (1) பயிற்சியில் உள்ள LSTM ஆழமான புதிய பிணையத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல் கற்றப்பட்ட ஒரு தொடர் பிரதிநிதியில் கற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ள ஒரு LSTM வலைப்பின்னல் கற்றுக் கொண்ட ஒரு தொடர (4) வார்த்தையும் எழுத்து n- கிராம் வார்த்தையின் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பயிற்சியின் பகுதியாக, பல வார்த்தை கூறுகள் (MWEs) மற்றும் எதிர்மறை வார்த்தைகளின் வடிவம் ஒரு SVR மீட்டாளர் முழு பண்புகளுக்கும் மேல் பயிற்சி செய்யப்படுகிறது. SemEval-2018 செயல் 1 தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் எங்கள் தனிப்பயன் அமைப்புகளின் விளைவை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் ஒரு பீர்சன் இணைப்பை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் தொடர்பு தொடர', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک ٹویٹ کے احساسات مضبوطی کے ذریعے ایک دوسری روزگاری سیستم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. ہم نے ایک بہت سی منطقی فکرت کی تعلیم مکانیزم کی تخلیق کی کہ ایک ٹویٹ کے سب سے جدا ہونے والی سیمنٹی فکرت کو پکڑ سکیں اور اس میں ہر کلمہ کے ذریعہ اس کی احساسات معلومات کو پکڑ سکیں۔ ہم چھ طریقے فرصت گروہوں کو جمع کرتے ہیں: (1) ایک ٹویٹ نمایش جسے ایک LSTM عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کے ذریعہ سیکھا گیا ہے (2) ایک ٹویٹ نمایش جسے ایک LSTM نیٹ ورک نے ایک بڑے ٹویٹ کے کورپوس پر سکھایا ہے جو احساسات کلمات (ایک دور نظر کے کورپوس) ہے (3) کلمات امبرڈینگ دور نظر کے کورپوس پر آموزش کی گئی ہے (4) کلمات اور علامت n-گرم, (5) مختلف احساسات اور احساسات لکسونز سے آتے ہیں اور (6) دوسرے ہاتھ بنائے ہوئے فرصت۔ ہم نے کلمات کی تعلیم کی حصہ میں بھی بہت سی کلمات کی مثالیں (MWEs) اور کلمات کی مخالفت کی شکل یاد رکھی ہیں۔ Name ہم نے ہماری نسمبل فوجینٹ کے مطابقت کا ارزش کرلیا ہے جو نصف Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۱ ڈیٹ سٹ پر ہے اور پیرسون کے 72% کی نسبت تئیٹ احساسات مضبوط پیش بینی کے کام پر ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz Twitterdan hissiyotning eng kuchini o'zgartirish tizimini anglatamiz. Biz Twitterning eng ajoyib semantik xususiyatlarini qabul qilish uchun ko'plab qo'shimcha foydalanuvchi mechanisni, va uning bir so'zdagi bir so'zlar bilan keladigan hissiyot haqida o'rganamiz. Biz 6 turli xohsiyatlar guruhini birlashtiramiz: (1) Taʼlim tarmoqda LSTM juda yaxshi neyron tarmoqda o'rganilgan Twitterdan foydalanuvchi, (2) o'rganilgan LSTM tarmoqda foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchiga o'rganilgan Twitterdan foydalanuvchi (masalan suhbat korpusi), (3) masofadagi taʼminlovchi soʻzlarda o'rganilgan so'zlar o'rganilgan va Twitterdan hamma so'zlarda o' (4) so'z va harf n- gram, (5) xususiyatlar har xil hissiyalar va hissiyotlar leksikasidan imkoniyatlar va boshqa qo'llangan moslamalar. Biz bir so'zlarning ko'plab so'zlar (MWEs) va bir so'zlar (MWEs) kabi so'zlarning tashkilotlarini o'rganamiz. Name Biz SemEval-2018 Vazifaning 1 maʼlumotlar satrini qiymatimiz va Twitter hissiyotning eng kuch hisoblanishi vazifasini 72% bilan birlashtiramiz.", 'vi': "Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống hồi phục để ngụ ý sức mạnh cảm xúc của tweet. Chúng tôi phát triển một cơ chế học về các đặc điểm đa dạng để nắm bắt các nét chữ dối trá phân biệt nhất của mỗi dòng tweet cũng như thông tin cảm xúc được truyền bởi mỗi từ trong đó. Chúng tôi kết hợp sáu loại các nhóm đặc trưng: 1) một mô tả trên Twitter được học bởi một hệ thống thần kinh sâu nhất của tập đoàn LSTM trên một tập hợp các dòng tweet có thể chứa các từ cảm xúc (một tập đoàn giám sát xa xôi), 3) từ ngữ được huấn luyện trên tập đoàn giám sát xa xôi và trung hơn tất cả các từ trên Twitter, (4) Từ và ký tự n-gam, yếu tố bắt nguồn từ ngôn ngữ cảm xúc và xúc khác nhau, và (6) những tính n ăng tự làm thủ công khác nhau. Như một phần của khóa huấn luyện ghép từ, chúng tôi cũng học các biểu hiện đa từ (MWEs) và các hình thức từ chối. Một tác nhân thụt lùi SVR được đào tạo trên toàn bộ các tính năng. Chúng tôi đánh giá hiệu quả của bộ cài đặt kết cấu của chúng tôi về tập tin của SemEvl-thẩm 8 1 và đạt được một mối tương quan giữa Pearson và 72='về nhiệm vụ dự đoán nồng độ cảm xúc của tweet.", 'bg': 'В тази статия ние предлагаме регресионна система за извеждане на емоционалната интензивност на туит. Разработваме мултиаспектен механизъм за обучение на функции, за да уловим най-дискриминационните семантични характеристики на туит, както и емоционалната информация, предавана от всяка дума в него. Комбинираме шест типа функционални групи: (1) представяне на туитове, научено от дълбока невронна мрежа на ЛСТМ върху данните за обучение, (2) представяне на туитове, научено от мрежа на ЛСТМ върху голям корпус от туитове, съдържащи емоционални думи (отдалечен корпус за надзор), (3) вграждане на думи, обучени върху отдалечен корпус за надзор и средно изчислени върху всички думи в туитове, (4) думи и символи, (5) характеристики, произтичащи от различни сентиментални и емоционални лексикони, и (6) други ръчно изработени функции. Като част от обучението по вграждане на думата научаваме и разпределените представи на многословните изрази и отрицателните форми на думи. След това регресорът се обучава върху целия набор от функции. Оценяваме ефективността на нашите ансамбълни функционални набори върху наборите от данни Задача 1 и постигаме корелация на Пиърсън от 72% по задачата за прогнозиране на интензивността на емоциите в Туитър.', 'nl': "In dit artikel stellen we een regressiesysteem voor om de emotionele intensiteit van een tweet te bepalen. We ontwikkelen een multi-aspect feature learning mechanisme om de meest discriminerende semantische kenmerken van een tweet vast te leggen, evenals de emotie informatie die door elk woord wordt overgebracht. We combineren zes soorten feature groups: (1) een tweet representatie geleerd door een LSTM diep neuraal netwerk op de trainingsdata, (2) een tweet representatie geleerd door een LSTM netwerk op een groot corpus tweets die emotie woorden bevatten (een afstandelijk supervisie corpus), (3) woordembeddingen getraind op het afstandelijk supervisie corpus en gemiddeld over alle woorden in een tweet, (4) woord en teken n-grammen, (5) kenmerken afgeleid van verschillende sentiment en emotie lexicons, en (6) andere handgemaakte kenmerken. Als onderdeel van de woordinbedding training leren we ook de gedistribueerde representaties van multi-word expressions (MWE's) en ontkende woordvormen. Een SVR regressor wordt vervolgens getraind over de volledige set van functies. We evalueren de effectiviteit van onze ensemble feature sets op de SemEval-2018 Taak 1 datasets en bereiken een Pearson correlatie van 72% op de taak van tweet emotie intensiteit voorspelling.", 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi et regressionssystem til at udlede følelsesintensiteten af en tweet. Vi udvikler en multi-aspekt funktion læringsmekanisme til at fange de mest diskriminerende semantiske træk i en tweet samt de følelsesoplysninger, der formidles af hvert ord i den. Vi kombinerer seks typer af funktionsgrupper: (1) en tweet repræsentation lært af et LSTM dybt neuralt netværk på træningsdataene, (2) en tweet repræsentation lært af et LSTM netværk på et stort korpus af tweets, der indeholder følelsesord (et fjernt overvågningskorpus), (3) ordindlejringer trænet på fjernt overvågningskorpus og gennemsnittet over alle ord i en tweet, (4) ord og tegn n-grams, (5) træk afledt af forskellige følelses- og følelsesleksikoer, og (6) andre håndlavede træk. Som en del af ordet embedding træning, lærer vi også de distribuerede repræsentationer af multi-word udtryk (MWE) og negated former for ord. En SVR regressor trænes derefter over hele sættet af funktioner. Vi evaluerer effektiviteten af vores ensemble funktionssæt på SemEval-2018 Task 1 datasæt og opnår en Pearson korrelation på 72% på opgaven med tweet følelsesintensitet forudsigelse.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein Regressionssystem vor, um die Emotionsintensität eines Tweets zu bestimmen. Wir entwickeln einen Multi-Aspect Feature Learning Mechanismus, um die diskriminierendsten semantischen Merkmale eines Tweets sowie die Emotionsinformationen, die jedes Wort in ihm vermittelt, zu erfassen. Wir kombinieren sechs Arten von Merkmalsgruppen: (1) eine Tweet-Darstellung, die von einem LSTM tiefen neuronalen Netzwerk auf den Trainingsdaten erlernt wird, (2) eine Tweet-Darstellung, die von einem LSTM-Netzwerk auf einem großen Korpus von Tweets gelernt wird, die Emotionswörter enthalten (ein entfernter Supervisionskorpus), (3) Worteinbettungen, die auf dem entfernten Supervisionskorpus trainiert und über alle Wörter eines Tweets gemittelt werden, (4) Wort- und Zeichenn-Gramm, (5) Merkmale, die aus verschiedenen Empfindungs- und Emotionslexikons abgeleitet sind, und (6) andere handgefertigte Merkmale. Im Rahmen des Worteinbettungstrainings lernen wir auch die verteilten Darstellungen von Mehrwortausdrücken (MWEs) und negierten Wortformen. Ein SVR-Regressor wird dann über den gesamten Funktionsumfang geschult. Wir bewerten die Effektivität unserer Ensemble-Feature-Sets auf den SemEval-2018 Task 1 Datensätzen und erzielen eine Pearson Korrelation von 72% auf die Aufgabe der Tweet Emotion Intensity Vorhersage.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo regresijski sustav da zarazi emocionalnu intenzitet tweet a. Razvijamo mehanizam učenja višeaspekta kako bi uhvatili najdiskriminirajuće semantičke karakteristike tweet a, kao i emocionalne informacije koje su prenijele svaka riječ u njemu. Kombiniramo šest vrsta grupa karakteristika: (1) predstavljanje tweet a koje je naučila LSTM duboka neuralna mreža o podacima obuke, (2) predstavljanje tweeta koje je naučila LSTM mreža na velikom korpusu tweeta koji sadrži emocionalne riječi (daljnji korpus nadzora), (3) pripreme riječi obučene na daljnjem korpusu nadzora i prosječne na svim riječima u tweetu, (4) riječ i karakter n-grama, (5) karakteristike iz različitih osjećaja i emocija leksija i (6) drugih karakteristika koje su napravljene rukama. Kao dio treninga riječi uključujući, također učimo raspodjeljene predstave višeriječnih izraza (MWEs) i negativne oblike riječi. SVR regressor je onda obučen preko punog kompleta funkcija. Procjenjujemo učinkovitost naših osnovnih karakteristika na setovima podataka za pola Evala-2018 i postićemo korelaciju Pearson a od 72% na zadatku predviđanja intenzitete tweeta emocija.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 트위터의 정서적 강도를 추측하기 위해 회귀 시스템을 제시했다.우리는 다방면의 특징 학습 메커니즘을 개발하여 추문에서 가장 식별력 있는 의미 특징과 추문에서 모든 단어가 전달하는 감정 정보를 포착했다.우리는 6가지 유형의 특징팀을 결합시켰다. (1) LSTM 심층신경 네트워크가 훈련 데이터에서 학습한 트위터는 (2) LSTM 네트워크가 감정어를 포함하는 대형 트위터 자료 라이브러리(원격 감독 자료 라이브러리)에서 학습한 트위터는 (3) 원격 감독 자료 라이브러리에서 훈련한 단어를 삽입하고 트위터의 모든 단어를 평균적으로(4) 단어와 문자 n-gram, (5) 각종 정서와 감정 어휘의 특징, 그리고 (6) 기타 수작업으로 만든 특징에서 나온다.단어 삽입 훈련의 일부로서 우리는 다중 단어 표현식(MWE)의 분포식 표현과 단어의 부정 형식을 배운다.그리고 SVR 회귀기에 대해 전체적인 특징을 훈련한다.우리는SemEval-18퀘스트1 데이터집합에서 우리의 통합기능집합의 유효성을 평가했고 트위터 정서강도 예측 퀘스트에서 72%의 필슨 관련성을 실현했다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan sistem regresi untuk menyimpulkan intensitas emosi dari tweet. Kami mengembangkan mekanisme pembelajaran berbagai aspek untuk menangkap karakteristik semantis paling diskriminatif dari tweet serta informasi emosi yang disebarkan oleh setiap kata di dalamnya. Kami menggabungkan enam jenis kelompok fitur: (1) representation tweet belajar oleh jaringan saraf dalam LSTM pada data latihan, (2) representation tweet belajar oleh jaringan LSTM pada tubuh besar tweet yang mengandung kata-kata emosi (korpus pengawasan jauh), (3) embedding kata dilatih pada korpus pengawasan jauh dan rata-rata atas semua kata dalam tweet,  (4) word and character n-grams, (5) features derived from various sentiment and emotion lexicons, and (6) other hand-crafted features.  Sebagai bagian dari latihan penyembedding kata, kita juga belajar represisi distribusi dari ekspresi multi-kata (MWEs) dan bentuk negasi kata. Sebuah regressor SVR kemudian dilatih atas set lengkap ciri-ciri. Kami mengevaluasi efektivitas set fitur ensemble kami pada set data SemEval-2018 Task 1 dan mencapai korelasi Pearson 72% pada tugas prediksi intensitas emosi tweet.', 'sw': 'In this paper, we propose a regression system to infer the emotion intensity of a tweet.  Tunaendeleza mfumo wa kujifunza kwa upande mwingi wa namna ya kuangalia vipengele vinavyotofauti zaidi kwenye twita pamoja na taarifa za hisia zilizotangazwa na kila neno hilo. Tunaunganisha a in a sita ya utaalamu: (1) uwakilishi wa twita uliojifundiwa na mtandao wa LSTM wa ndani wa taarifa za mafunzo, (2) uwakilishi wa twita uliojifunzwa na mtandao wa LSTM kwenye mtandao mkubwa wa twiti ambazo ina maneno makubwa ya hisia (makala ya kufuatilia mbali), (3) maneno yaliyofundishwa kwenye makampuni ya ufuatiliaji wa mbali na kuonekana kwa wastani zaidi ya maneno yote katika twita, (4) neno na mhusika n-grams, (5) vipengele vilivyotoka kwenye hisia mbalimbali na hisia, na (6) vipengele vingine vilivyopangwa mkono. Kama sehemu ya neno la mafunzo, pia tunajifunza uwakilizaji wa maneno mengi (MWEs) na aina mbaya za maneno. Mdhibiti wa SVR baadae anafundishwa juu ya seti kamili. Tutathmini ufanisi wa kitendo chetu cha utambulisho katika seti za kazi 1 za SemEval-2018 na kufikia Pearson kuhusiana na asilimia 72 juu ya kazi ya kutabiri kwa kiwango kikubwa cha hisia za twita.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n regresasie stelsel om die emosie intensiteit van 'n tweet te infeer. Ons ontwikkel 'n multiaspekt-funksie leer mekanisme om die mees diskriminasiewe semantiese funksies van 'n tweet en die emosie inligting wat deur elke woord daarin versprei word te vang. Ons kombinieer ses tipes van funksie groepe: (1) ' n tweet voorstelling geleer deur 'n LSTM diep neuralnetwerk op die onderwerp data, (2) ' n tweet voorstelling geleer deur 'n LSTM netwerk op 'n groot korpus van tweete wat emosie woorde ( 'n afgeleë supervisie korpus), (3) woord inbêdings onderwerp op die afgeleë supervisie korpus en gemeenskap oor alle woorde in 'n tweet, (4) woord en karakter n-grame, (5) funksies afgelei van verskillende sentimente en emosionele leksies en (6) ander hand-gebruikte funksies. As deel van die woord ingesluit onderwerp, leer ons ook die verspreidige voorstellings van multiwoord uitdrukkings (MWEs) en negatiewe vorms van woorde. Name Ons evalueer die effektiviteit van ons ensemble funksie stel op die semiEval-2018 taak 1 datastel en bereik 'n Pearson korrelasie van 72% op die taak van tweet emosie intensiteit voorskou.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک سیستم تجاوز را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا سرعت احساسات یک تویت را آلوده کند. ما یک مکانیسم یادگیری از طریق بسیاری از منطقه\u200cهای متفاوتی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم تا بهترین ویژگی\u200cهای سیمانتی از یک تویت و اطلاعات احساساتی که توسط هر کلمه توسعه می\u200cشود را بگیریم. ما شش نوع گروه ویژگی را ترکیب می\u200cکنیم: (۱) یک نمایش توئیت توسط شبکه عصبی عمیق LSTM در اطلاعات آموزش یاد گرفته است، (۲) یک نمایش توئیت توسط شبکه LSTM در یک کورپوس بزرگ از توئیت\u200cها آموزش یاد گرفته است که کلمات احساسات (یک کورپوس نظارت دور) دارد، (۳) استفاده\u200cهای کلمات در کورپوس نظارت دور آموزش یاد (4) کلمه و karakter n-grams, (5) ویژگی\u200cهای مختلف احساسات و لکسیون احساسات و (6) ویژگی\u200cهای دیگر از دست\u200cساخته شده است. به عنوان بخشی از کلمه آموزش پیدا کردن، ما همچنین نمایش\u200cهای متوسط کلمه\u200cها (MWEs) و شکل\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای منفی را یاد می\u200cگیریم. یک بازرس SVR بعد روی مجموعه کامل ویژگی آموزش می\u200cشود. ما تاثیر فعالیت ویژه\u200cهای ما را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ۱ تابع نیم\u200cEval-2018 ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم و یک ارتباط پیرسون 72 درصد در کار پیش\u200cبینی شدت احساسات توئیت می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, tweet duýgularyň ýigrenligini azaltmak üçin regressiýa sistemasyny teklip edýäris. Biz tweet in iň diskriminiň semantik karakterlerini we olaryň her sözlerine gürleşýän duýgym maglumatyny almak üçin birnäçe aspekt özellikleri öwrenmek mekanizmasyny döreýäris. Biz alty hili özellikler toparyny birleşdirýäris: (1) duýgulan sözleri (uzak superviziýa corpus) we uzak superviziýa korpusynda öwrenen tweet düzümlerni (3) tweet içindeki ähli sözleriň üstünde öwrenen tweet sanlaryny birleşdirýäris. (4) söz we karakter n-gramlar, (5) dürli duýgular we duýgular leksiklerinden çykan karakterler we (6) başga elimden çykan karakterler. Eňleşen okuwçylygyň bir parçası bolsa, biz hem multi-söz ifadelerinin (MWEs) ve sözlerin töweregini öwrendik. Sonra bir SVR regressor doly özellikleriň üstünde eğlenýär. SemEval-2018 Taýýarlarymyzda 1-nji çykyş sahypalarynda çykyşlygymyzda çykyşlygymyzda çykyşlygymyzda 72% Pearson-yň düşmegini tapdyrys.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ռեգրեսիոն համակարգ, որպեսզի հաշվի առնենք թվիթի զգացմունքների ինտենսիվությունը: Մենք զարգանում ենք բազմաասպեկտների ուսումնասիրության մեխանիզմ, որպեսզի գրանցենք թվիթի ամենախտրականորեն սեմանտիկ հատկությունները, ինչպես նաև այն բառերի յուրաքանչյուր հուզական տեղեկատվությունը: Մենք համադրում ենք վեց տեսակի հատկանիշների խմբեր: (1) Թվիթ ներկայացում, որը սովորել է LSMT-ի խորը նյարդային ցանցի միջոցով ուսումնասիրելու տվյալների վրա, (2) Թվիթ ներկայացում, որը սովորել է LSMT-ի ցանցի միջոցով Թվիթ-ի մեծ կորպոսի վրա, որը պարունակում է զգացմունքներ բառեր (հեռավոր վերահսկողական կորպոս), (3)  (4) բառ և բնավորություն n-գրամ, (5) առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք առաջացել են տարբեր զգացմունքների և զգացմունքների լեքսիկոններից, և (6) այլ ձեռքով ստեղծված առանձնահատկություններ: Որպես ուսուցման ներառման բառի մի մաս, մենք նաև սովորում ենք բազմաբառերի արտահայտությունների (MWE) և բառերի բառերի բացատրված տեսակների բացատրված արտահայտությունները: Այնուհետև ՎԻԱՎ ռեգրեսերն է վարժեցվում ամբողջ հատկությունների ընթացքում: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր համակարգչային հատկանիշների արդյունավետությունը ՍեմԵվալ 2018-ի առաջին հանձնարարության տվյալների համակարգերի վրա և հասնում ենք Պիրսոնի 72 տոկոսի հարաբերակցության Թվիթի զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության կանխատեսման խնդրի վրա:', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, propozojmë një sistem regresioni për të përfshirë intensitetin emocional të një tweet. Ne zhvillojmë një mekanizëm mësimi me shumë aspekte për të kapur karakteristikat më diskriminuese semantike të një tweet si dhe informacionin emocional të transmetuar nga çdo fjalë në të. Ne kombinojmë gjashtë lloje grupesh karakteristike: (1) një përfaqësim tweeti mësuar nga një rrjet nervor të thellë LSTM në të dhënat e stërvitjes, (2) një përfaqësim tweeti mësuar nga një rrjet LSTM në një korpus të madh tweete që përmban fjalë emocionale (një korpus mbikqyrës i largët), (3) përfaqësim fjalësh stërvitur në korpus mbikqyrës i largët dhe mesatar mbi të gjitha fjalët në një tweet, (4) fjalë dhe karakter n-gram, (5) karakteristika të nxjerra nga leksikone të ndryshme të ndjenjave dhe emocioneve dhe (6) karakteristika të tjera të ndërtuara me dorë. Si pjesë e fjalës së stërvitjes së përfshirjes, ne gjithashtu mësojmë përfaqësimet e shpërndara të shprehjeve me shumë fjalë (MWEs) dhe forma të negata të fjalëve. Një regresor SVR është stërvitur mbi kompletin e karakteristikave. Ne vlerësojmë efektshmërinë e grupeve tona të llogaritjeve në SemEval-2018 Task 1 të dhënave dhe arrijmë një korrelacion Pearson prej 72% në detyrën e parashikimit të intensitetit të emocioneve në tweet.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች፣ የኢትዮጵያውያን ጉዳይ ትዊተር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በትዊተር ላይ የተለየውን የስምናዊ ስብሰባዎችን ለመማር በብዙ ጉዳይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የስድስት ዓይነት የፊደል ጉዳዮች:(1) የራቁ የራቀ ጉዳይ ካርፓስ ላይ በሚያስተምር የልSTM ጥልቅ የናውሬው መረብ የተማረ የTwitteet መልዕክት (2) የኢሌስቴም መረብ በተማረ ትዊተር ላይ የኢትዮጵያ ቃላት (ራቅ የራቀ ጉዳዩ ካርፓስ)፣ (3) ቃላት በሚያስተምሩ በትዊተር ላይ የተማረ እና በሁሉም ቃላት የተጠቃሚ እና በትዊተር ላይ የተማረ ትዊት መልዕክት፣  (4) word and character n-grams, (5) features derived from various sentiment and emotion lexicons, and (6) other hand-crafted features.  የንግግር ትምህርት ማድረግ ክፍል፣ የብዙ ቃላት (MWEs) እና የንግግር መልዕክቶች የክፍለ ክፍል እናስተማራለን፡፡ የSVR አስተዳደር በሙሉ ምርጫዎች ላይ ተማርቷል፡፡ የሳምEval-2018 ስራ 1 ዳታተር ማድረጊያዎች ላይ የሚደረገውን ጥያቄን እናስተዋልታለን የፌርሶንን ትዊተር ስህተት ግንኙነት የ72 በመቶ ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': "Bu kağızda, bir twet hissi a ğırlığını çəkmək üçün regresiya sistemini təklif edirik. Biz tweet in ən müxtəlif semantik özelliklərini və hər kəlmə ilə bildirilən emosyon məlumatını tutmaq üçün çoxlu-aspekt öyrənmə mehanizmini təhsil edirik. Biz altı təhsil gruplarını birləşdiririk: (1) təhsil məlumatlarında LSTM derin nöral a ğı tarafından öyrəndiyi tweet göstəricisi, (2) təhsil məlumatlarında öyrəndiyi LSTM ağı ilə öyrəndiyi tweet göstəricisi, duygusal sözləri (uzaq gözləmə korpusu), 3) sözləri uzaq gözləmə korpusu ilə təhsil edilmişdir və tüytindəki bütün sözlərdən öyrənmişdir. (4) Sözlər və karakterlər n-gramlar, (5) müxtəlif duygulardan və emosiyalıqlardan oluşan və (6) başqa əl yaratdığı özelliklər. Əlavə edilən sözün bir parçası olaraq, biz də çoxlu söz ifadələrinin (MWEs) və qeyri sözlərin bənzərini öyrənirik. Sonra SVR regressor bütün xüsusiyyətlərin üstündə təhsil edilir. Biz ensemble özelliklərimizin faydallığını SemEval-2018 Task 1 veri qurularında değerləşdiririk və vəsiyyət şiddətli tədbirlərinin vəzifəsində 72% Pearson'un bağlantısını başa çatdırırıq.", 'ca': "En aquest article, proposem un sistema de regressió per deduir la intensitat emocional d'un tweet. We develop a multi-aspect feature learning mechanism to capture the most discriminative semantic features of a tweet as well as the emotion information conveyed by each word in it.  Combinem sis tipus de grups de característiques: (1) una representació en tweet aprenida per una xarxa neuronal profunda de LSTM en les dades d'entrenament, (2) una representació en tweet aprenida per una xarxa de LSTM en un gran corpus de tweets que contenen paraules emocionals (un corpus de supervisió remot), (3) incorporacions de paraules entrenades en el corpus de supervisió remot i mitjançades sobre totes les paraules d'un tweet, (4) paraula i caràcter n-grams, (5) característiques derivades de diversos lexicòns de sentiment i emoció, i (6) altres característiques artificials a mà. Com part de la paraula entrenament d'incorporació, també aprenem les representacions distribuïdes d'expressions multiparaules (MWEs) i formes negatives de paraules. Un regresor SVR s'entrena per tot el conjunt de característiques. Evaluam l'eficacia dels conjunts de característiques del nostre conjunt en els conjunts de dades SemEval-2018 Task 1 i aconseguem una correlació Pearson del 72% en la tasca de predicció de l'intensitat emocional en tweet.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নিয়ন্ত্রণ ব্যবস্থা প্রস্তাব করি টুইটের অনুভূতিকে প্রভাবিত করার জন্য। আমরা একটি টুইটের সবচেয়ে বৈষম্যশীল সেমান্টিক বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য ধরার জন্য একটি বহুদিকের বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করি এবং তার মধ্যে প্রত্যেক শব্দের আমরা ছয়টি ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্য গ্রুপ একত্রিত করি: (১) টুইটারের প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যে একটি এলস্টিএম গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক শিক্ষিত একটি টুইট প্রতিনিধিত্বে (২) একটি টুইট প্রতিনিধিত্বিতীয় টুইটে একটি বিশাল টুইটে (৪) শব্দ এবং চরিত্র n-gram, (৫) বিভিন্ন অনুভূতি এবং আবেগের লেক্সিকোর থেকে বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং (৬) অন্যান্য হাতের ক্ষমতার বৈ এই শব্দের প্রশিক্ষণের অংশ হিসেবে আমরা অনেক শব্দ বিতরণের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে পারি এবং নেতিবাচক শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের বিতরণ এসভিআর পুরো বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়। আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ১ ডাটাসেটে আমাদের বৈশিষ্ট্যের কার্যক্রমের মূল্যায়ন করি এবং টুইটার অনুভূতির গভীর ভবিষ্যৎবাণী সম্পর্কে ৭২% পেয়ারসনের সম', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo sistem regresije da se inficira emocionalna intenzitet tweet a. Mi razvijamo mehanizam učenja multiaspekta kako bi uhvatili najdiskriminirajuće semantičke karakteristike tweet a, kao i emocionalne informacije koje su prenijele svakom riječima u njemu. Kombinujemo šest vrsta grupa karakteristika: (1) predstavljanje tweet a koje je naučila LSTM duboka neuralna mreža na podacima obuke, (2) predstavljanje tweeta koje je naučila LSTM mreža na velikom korpusu tweeta koji sadrži emocionalne riječi (daljinski korpus nadzora), (3) ugrađenje riječi obučene na korpusu daljinog nadzora i prosječavanje svih riječi u tweetu, (4) riječ i karakter n-grama, 5) karakteristika iz različitih osjećaja i emocija leksija i (6) drugih karakteristika koje su napravljene rukama. Kao dio treninga riječi uključujući, također učimo raspodjeljene predstave višeriječnih izraza (MWEs) i negativne oblike riječi. SVR regressor je onda obučen preko punog seta karakteristika. Procjenjujemo učinkovitost naših osnovnih karakteristika na setovima podataka za pola Evala-2018 i ostvarimo korelaciju Pearson a od 72% na zadatku predviđanja intenzitete tweeta emocija.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme regresní systém pro odvození emoční intenzity tweetu. Vyvíjíme víceaspektový učební mechanismus pro zachycení nejvíce diskriminačních sémantických rysů tweetu, stejně jako emočních informací přenášených každým slovem v něm. Kombinujeme šest typů funkčních skupin: (1) reprezentaci tweetu naučené hlubokou neuronovou sítí LSTM na tréninkových datech, (2) reprezentaci tweetu naučené LSTM sítí na velkém korpusu tweetů obsahujících emoční slova (korpus vzdáleného dohledu), (3) vložení slov tréninkové na korpusu vzdáleného dohledu a průměrné nad všemi slovy ve tweetu, (4) slovo a znak n-gramy, (5) rysy odvozené z různých sentimentních a emočních lexikonů a (6) další ručně vytvořené prvky. V rámci školení vkládání slov se také naučíme distribuované reprezentace víceslovních výrazů (MWE) a negovaných forem slov. Regressor SVR je pak trénován v celé sadě funkcí. Hodnotíme efektivitu našich souborových funkčních sad na datových sadách SemEval-2018 Task 1 a dosahujeme Pearsonovy korelace 72% na úkolu predikce intenzity tweetů.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume välja regressioonisüsteemi, mille abil tuletada säutsu emotsioonide intensiivsus. Töötame välja multifunktsionaalse õppemehhanismi, et jäädvustada säutsu kõige diskrimineerivamaid semantilisi omadusi ja emotsiooniteavet, mida edastab iga sõna. Kombineerime kuut tüüpi funktsioonirühma: (1) LSTM-i sügavnärvivõrgu poolt treeningandmetel õppitud säutsu esitus, (2) LSTM-i võrgu poolt õppitud säutsu esitus suurel säutsu korpusel, mis sisaldab emotsionaalseid sõnu (kauge järelevalvekorpus), (3) kauge järelevalvekorpusel õpetatud sõnade põimimine ja keskmine kõigi säutsu sõnade kohta, (4) sõna ja märgi n-grammid, (5) erinevatest tunnete ja emotsioonide leksikonidest tulenevad omadused ja (6) muud käsitsi valmistatud omadused. Osana sõna manustamise koolitusest õpime ka mitmesõnaliste väljendite (MWE) ja negatiivsete sõnade hajutatud esitusi. Seejärel koolitatakse SVR regressor üle kogu funktsioonide komplekti. Hindame oma ansambli funktsioonide komplektide efektiivsust SemEval-2018 ülesande 1 andmekogumites ja saavutame Pearsoni 72% korrelatsiooni säutsu emotsioonide intensiivsuse prognoosimise ülesandel.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme regressiojärjestelmää twiitin tunteiden voimakkuuden määrittämiseksi. Kehitämme moniulotteisen ominaisuuksien oppimismekanismin, joka tallentaa twiitin kaikkein syrjivimmät semanttiset ominaisuudet sekä jokaisen sanan välittämän tunteen. Yhdistämme kuutta eri ominaisuusryhmää: (1) LSTM:n syvähermoverkon oppima tweet-esitys harjoitusdatasta, (2) LSTM:n verkon oppima tweet-esitys suuressa tweet-korpusessa, joka sisältää tunnesanoja (etäinen valvontakorpus), (3) etäiseen valvontakorpuseen koulutetut ja twiitin kaikkien sanojen keskiarvot, (4) sanan ja merkin n-grammat, (5) erilaisista tunteiden ja tunteiden sanastoista johdettuja ominaisuuksia, ja (6) muita käsin tehtyjä ominaisuuksia. Osana sanan upottamiskoulutusta opimme myös monikanavaisten ilmaisujen (MWE) ja negatiivisten sanojen hajautettuja representaatioita. Tämän jälkeen SVR-regressori opetellaan läpi kaikki ominaisuudet. Arvioimme ryhmäominaisuuksiemme tehokkuutta SemEval-2018 Task 1 -aineistoissa ja saavutamme 72%:n Pearsonin korrelaation tweetin tunteiden voimakkuuden ennustamiseen.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã bukãtar da wani na'ura da za'a ƙara kashi na hisani. Munã buɗe masu amfani da masu mulki masu yawa da za'a sami matsayin ya kamata mafiya saurin mutane na Twitter da kuma ma'anar hisãbi da aka saka shi a cikin. Tuna haɗa nau'in situ masu hushi: (1) wani mai gaya na rubutu wanda aka sanar da shi na LSSM na ƙarƙashin neural a kan data mai amfani, (2) wani mai gaya na rubutu ya sanar da shi na shirin LSSM a kan wani nauyi mai girma na Twitter wanda ke ƙunsa da sautin hiso (wani abu mai nĩsa ya wato), (4) magana and character n-gram, (5) feature that comes from several hison and hison, and (6) other feature-hannayen-hannayen. Kama rabin maganar da ke yin amfani da shi, ko kuma munã fahimta masu gauraya wa masu fassarar magana masu yawa (MWEs) da tsari masu haske. An sanar da wata SV-regressor sa'an nan an cikakken zaɓen feature. Tuna ƙaddara game da aikin da ke samar aikin da ke samu akan aikin na Semeval-2018 kuma mu sami wani shirin Pearson da ke danganta a shekarar 7% a kan aikin hisãbin na Twitter.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo regresijski sistem za sklepanje intenzivnosti čustev tweeta. Razvijamo večaspektni učni mehanizem za zajem najbolj diskriminativnih semantičnih značilnosti tweeta in informacij o čustvih, ki jih prenaša vsaka beseda v njem. Združujemo šest vrst funkcijskih skupin: (1) predstavitev tvitov, ki se ga je naučila LSTM globoka nevronska mreža na podatkih o treningu, (2) predstavitev tvitov, ki se je naučila LSTM mreža na velikem korpusu tvitov, ki vsebuje čustvene besede (korpus oddaljenega nadzora), (3) vgradnje besed, usposobljene na korpusu oddaljenega nadzora in povprečje vseh besed v tweetu, (4) besedne in značilne n-grame, (5) značilnosti, ki izhajajo iz različnih čustvenih leksikonov in (6) druge ročno izdelane funkcije. V okviru usposabljanja za vključevanje besed se učimo tudi porazdeljenih predstavitev večbesednih izrazov (MWE) in negativnih oblik besed. Regresor SVR je nato usposobljen za celoten nabor funkcij. Ocenjujemo učinkovitost naših naborov funkcij ansambela na naboru podatkov SemEval-2018 Task 1 in dosegamo Pearsonovo korelacijo 72% pri napovedovanju intenzivnosti čustev tweeta.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מערכת חזרה כדי להוציא את האינטנסיביות הרגשית של טוויט. אנחנו מפתחים מנגנון למידה ממספר אפקטים כדי לתפוס את האופיינסים הסמנטיים הכי מיוחדים של טוויט, כמו גם את המידע הרגשי שנעבר על ידי כל מילה שבה. אנחנו משלבים שישה סוגים של קבוצות תכונות: (1) מייצג טוויט שנלמד על ידי רשת עצבית עמוקה של LSTM על נתוני האימון, (2) מייצג טוויט שנלמד על ידי רשת LSTM על גוף גדול של טוויטים שמכיל מילים רגשיות (גוף פיקוח רחוק), (3) מייצג מילים מאומן על גוף הפיקוד הרחוק וממוצע על כל מילים בטוויט, (4) מילה ודמות n-גרם, (5) תכונות שנוצרו משונים של רגשות וקסיקונים רגשיים, ו (6) תכונות נוספות שנוצרו ביד. כחלק מהמילה של אימון קישום, אנחנו גם לומדים את הייצגות המפורסמות של ביטוי מילים רבות (MWEs) וצורות משולשות של מילים. מחדש SVR מאומן לאחר מכן על הסט המלא של תכונות. אנו מעריכים את היעילות של קבוצת תכונות האנסמבל שלנו על קבוצת נתונים של משימה 1 SemEval-2018 ולהשיג תקשורת פירסון של 72% על משימה של חיזוי אינטנסיבות רגשות טוויט.', 'jv': 'Nanging kuwi iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno sistem réaksi kanggo ngerasakno karo sistem sing apik tuat. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem sing sampeyan karo Multi-Aspek kuwi bisa nguasai sistem sing nyimpen winih dhéwé kuwi nggawe sistem semantar sing apik dhéwé karo sistem sing koyok ngono awak dhéwé kuwi bisa pasar. Awak dhéwé éntukno sesuk gatik karo karo perusahaan (1) sing nyimpen karo sistem sing nyimpen karo hal netwisan Neral sing kudu nggawe data (2) sing nyimpen tur dhéwé sing nyimpen karo alam sing ditawak dhéwé lan tuwit kuwi tindakan gawe lan sampeyan duwé (kotak kudu supayan karo perusahaan) (3) sing ditambal kuwi tindakan babagan sampeyan wigat (4) Perintah lan Karakter n-gram(5) Kemerdekaan kang dibalat karo kesalahan karo mulalah Taning kelelah karo aturan ingkang alaman sing nyelehake, kita uga nggambar aparaning multi-word expresyon (MTE) lan nganggo pergambar aparaning layar. Name Awak dhéwé éntukno efekasi sing nggawe aturan sing beraksi karo hal gewis dipunanggé karo Samsul-2008 task 1 dataset dan nggawe barang nggawe perusahaan sing perusahaan 75% sing uwong karo nggawe éntuk sing paling apik nyegatining alaman sing apik dhéwé.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོར་བརྗོད་འཐབ་རིམ་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། We develop a multi-aspect feature learning mechanism to capture the most discriminative semantic features of a tweet as well as the emotion information conveyed by each word in it. We combine six types of feature groups: (1) a tweet representation learned by an LSTM deep neural network on the training data, (2) a tweet representation learned by an LSTM network on a large corpus of tweets that contain emotion words (a distant supervision corpus), (3) word embeddings trained on the distant supervision corpus and averaged over all words in a tweet, (4) སྐད་ཡིག་དང་ཡིག་འབྲུ་n-grams, (5) ཆ་ཤས་འདི་ནི་སེམས་ཚོར་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་ཐོག་ལས་འབྱུང་ཡོད་པ། གནད་ཕྱོགས་གཞན་ཞིག་གི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆ་ དབྱིབས་འཇུག་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་དོན་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པ་དེ་ཚོར་ཤེས་ཐུབ། དེ་ནས་SVR བསྡུས་མཁན་ཞིག་ནི་ཆ་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚང་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཀྱིས་ཤེས་བྱས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ensemble feature དེ་གིས་SemEval-2018 Task 1 datasets་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡུལ་གྱིས་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་ཐུབ་པའི་ Pearson correlation of 72% in the task of tweet emotion intensity prediction.'}
{'en': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : An Ensemble Model for Affect Prediction in Tweets', 'ar': 'Zewen في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: نموذج فرقة للتنبؤ بالتنبؤ في التغريدات', 'es': 'Zewen en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Un modelo conjunto para la predicción del afecto en los tuits', 'fr': "Zewen au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Un modèle d'ensemble pour la prédiction d'effet dans les tweets", 'pt': 'Zewen no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Um modelo de conjunto para previsão de afeto em tweets', 'ja': 'Zewen at SemEval -2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Affect Prediction in Tweets', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर Zewen: Tweets में प्रभावित भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक Ensemble मॉडल', 'ru': 'Zewen на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Ансамблевая модель для прогнозирования влияния в твитах', 'zh': 'Zewen在SemEval-2018务1:推文染占者集为模样', 'ga': 'Zewen ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Samhail Ensemble chun Tionchar a Thuar i dTuathanna', 'ka': 'Zewen-ს SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 1: შესაძლებელი მოდელის შესაძლებელი მოდელი Tweets-ში', 'hu': 'Zewen a SemEval-2018-as feladat 1: Együttes modell az érintések előrejelzésére Tweetekben', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Ένα μοντέλο συνόλου για την πρόβλεψη επιρροών στα tweets', 'it': 'Zewen al SemEval-2018 Task 1: Un modello di ensemble per la previsione degli effetti nei tweets', 'kk': 'Зевен 1- жарты- 2018 тапсырмасында: Твиттерде әсер етілген үлгілер үлгісі', 'lt': '„Zewen“ programos „SemEval-2018“ 1 užduotis: bendras poveikio prognozavimo modelis Tweetuose', 'mk': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Affect Prediction in Tweets', 'ms': 'Zewen di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Model Ensemble untuk Prediksi Kesan dalam Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1: ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Zewen f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Mudell Ensemble għat-Tbassir tal-Affetti fit-Tweets', 'pl': 'Zewen w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Model zespołu do prognozowania efektów w tweetach', 'mn': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Effective Prediction in Tweets', 'ro': 'Zewen la SemEval-2018 Task 1: Un model de ansamblu pentru predicția afectelor în tweets', 'no': 'Zewen ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Eit forskyvingsmodell for effektivt forhåndsvising i tweets', 'sr': 'Zewen na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Model za predviđanje uticaja na Tweets', 'sv': 'Zewen på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: En ensemblemodell för påverkansförutsägelse i tweets', 'si': 'Zewenen at semeval-2018 Job 1: an Ensemble Model for Affected Precdiction in Tweets', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் ஜீவென்: விளைவான விதிகாரத்திற்கான ஒரு ஒற்றைப்படையான மாதிரி', 'ur': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Effect Prediction in Tweets', 'so': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1: A Ensemable Model for Affect Prediction in Twitter', 'uz': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Affect Prediction in Tweets', 'vi': 'Zewen at SemEvl-2008 Task 1: Một mô hình đáng yêu cho dự đoán tình cảm trong Tweet', 'nl': 'Zewen bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Een ensemblemodel voor affectvoorspelling in Tweets', 'da': 'Zewen på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: En Ensemble Model for Påvirkningsforudsigelse i Tweets', 'bg': 'Зуен на Задача 1: Ансамблен модел за прогнозиране на ефектите в туитове', 'hr': 'Zewen na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Model za predviđanje utjecaja u Tweets', 'id': 'Zewen di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Sebuah Model Ensemble untuk Prediksi Affect di Tweets', 'de': 'Zewen bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Ein Ensemblemodell zur Affektvorhersage in Tweets', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 퀘스트 1: 트위터에서 감정 예측의 통합 모델', 'fa': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Effect Prediction in Tweets', 'sw': 'Zewen akiwa SemEval-2018 Vazifa 1: Utawala wa Utawala wa Sauti katika Twita', 'af': "Zewen by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: ' n Ensemble Model vir Aftekende voordeel in Tweets", 'sq': 'Zeven në SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Affect Prediction in Tweets', 'tr': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Affect Prediction in Tweets', 'am': 'Zewen በSemEval-2018 ስራ 1: ለጥያቄ ነጻነት ሞዴል በTweets', 'az': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1: A Ensemble Model for Effective Prediction in Tweets', 'bs': 'Zewen na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Model za predviđanje uticaja u Tweets', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮-এর কাজ ১: টুইটে প্রভাবিত শাসনের জন্য একটি সাধারণ মডেল', 'ca': "Zewen a SemEval-2018 tasca 1: Un model conjunt de predicció d'afectes en tweets", 'hy': 'Zeyen-ը 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ" առաջին հանձնարարությունում. Թվիթերում ազդեցություն կանխատեսելու միասնական մոդել', 'fi': 'Zewen SemEval-2018 Task 1: Ensemble Model for Affect Ennusting in Tweets', 'et': 'Zewen SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Ensembli mudel mõju prognoosimiseks tweetides', 'cs': 'Zewen na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Souborový model pro predikci efektů ve tweetech', 'jv': 'Jewen durung seminval-2008 task 1: an ENsemble model for AfEffectt predikion in Two', 'he': 'Zewen ב SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Affect Prediction in Tweets', 'sk': 'Zewen na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Model ansambla za napovedovanje vplivov v tweetih', 'ha': 'Taimar 1: A Ensemable Model for Affect Prediction in Twitter', 'bo': 'Zewen at SemEval-2018 Task 1: An Ensemble Model for Affect Prediction in Tweets'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a method for Affect in Tweets, which is the task to automatically determine the intensity of emotions and intensity of sentiment of tweets. The term affect refers to emotion-related categories such as anger, fear, etc. Intensity of emo-tions need to be quantified into a real valued score in [ 0, 1 ]. We propose an en-semble system including four different deep learning methods which are CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN and a CNN-based Attention model (CA). Our system gets an average Pearson correlation score of 0.682 in the subtask EI-reg and an average Pearson correlation score of 0.784 in subtask V-reg, which ranks 17th among 48 systems in EI-reg and 19th among 38 systems in V-reg.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة طريقة للتأثير في التغريدات ، وهي مهمة التحديد التلقائي لشدة الانفعالات وشدة مشاعر التغريدات. يشير مصطلح "التأثير" إلى الفئات المرتبطة بالعواطف مثل الغضب والخوف وما إلى ذلك. تحتاج شدة المشاعر إلى أن يتم قياسها في درجة حقيقية ذات قيمة في [0 ، 1]. نقترح نظامًا شاملًا يشتمل على أربع طرق مختلفة للتعلم العميق وهي CNN و Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM) و LSTM-CNN ونموذج الاهتمام المستند إلى CNN (CA). يحصل نظامنا على متوسط درجة ارتباط Pearson يبلغ 0.682 في المهمة الفرعية EI-reg ومتوسط درجة ارتباط Pearson البالغ 0.784 في المهمة الفرعية V-reg ، والتي تحتل المرتبة 17 من بين 48 نظامًا في EI-reg و 19 من بين 38 نظامًا في V-reg.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un método para Affect in Tweets, que consiste en determinar automáticamente la intensidad de las emociones y la intensidad del sentimiento de los tuits. El término afecto se refiere a categorías relacionadas con las emociones, como la ira, el miedo, etc. La intensidad de las emociones debe cuantificarse en una puntuación de valor real en [0, 1]. Proponemos un sistema de ensamblaje que incluye cuatro métodos diferentes de aprendizaje profundo que son CNN, LSTM bidireccional (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN y un modelo de atención (CA) basado en CNN. Nuestro sistema obtiene un puntaje de correlación de Pearson promedio de 0.682 en la subtarea EI-reg y un puntaje de correlación de Pearson promedio de 0.784 en la subtarea V-reg, que ocupa el puesto 17 entre 48 sistemas en EI-reg y el 19 entre 38 sistemas en V-reg.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une méthode pour l'effet dans les Tweets, qui consiste à déterminer automatiquement l'intensité des émotions et l'intensité du sentiment des tweets. Le terme affect fait référence à des catégories liées aux émotions telles que la colère, la peur, etc. L'intensité des émotions doit être quantifiée dans un score réel évalué en [0, 1]. Nous proposons un système d'ensemble comprenant quatre méthodes d'apprentissage profond différentes qui sont CNN, LSTM bidirectionnel (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN et un modèle d'attention basé sur CNN (CA). Notre système obtient un score de corrélation de Pearson moyen de 0,682 dans la sous-tâche EI-Reg et un score de corrélation de Pearson moyen de 0,784 dans la sous-tâche V-reg, qui se classe 17e parmi 48 systèmes dans EI-Reg et 19e parmi 38 systèmes dans V-reg.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um método para Afeto em Tweets, que é a tarefa de determinar automaticamente a intensidade das emoções e a intensidade do sentimento dos tweets. O termo afeto refere-se a categorias relacionadas à emoção, como raiva, medo, etc. A intensidade das emoções precisa ser quantificada em um valor real em [0, 1]. Propomos um sistema en-semble incluindo quatro métodos diferentes de aprendizado profundo que são CNN, LSTM bidirecional (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN e um modelo de atenção baseado em CNN (CA). Nosso sistema obtém uma pontuação média de correlação de Pearson de 0,682 na subtarefa EI-reg e uma pontuação média de correlação de Pearson de 0,784 na subtarefa V-reg, que ocupa o 17º entre 48 sistemas em EI-reg e 19º entre 38 sistemas em V-reg.', 'ja': '本稿では、感情の強さや感情の強さを自動的に判断する作業である「ツイートに影響を与える」方法を紹介する。影響という用語は、怒り、恐怖などの感情に関連するカテゴリを指します。絵文字の強度は、[0, 1]で実際に価値のあるスコアに定量化する必要があります。CNN、双方向LSTM （ BLSTM ）、LSTM - CNN、CNNベースのAttentionモデル（ CA ）の4つの異なるディープラーニングメソッドを含むアンサンブルシステムを提案します。当社のシステムは、サブタスクEI - regの平均ピアソン相関スコアは0.682、サブタスクV - regの平均ピアソン相関スコアは0.784であり、これはEI - regの48システム中17位、V - regの38システム中19位です。', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлен метод «Влияние в твитах», который является задачей автоматического определения интенсивности эмоций и интенсивности настроений твитов. Термин аффект относится к категориям, связанным с эмоциями, таким как гнев, страх и т. д. Интенсивность эмоций должна быть количественно определена в реальную оценку в [0, 1]. Мы предлагаем систему en-semble включая 4 различных метода глубокого обучения которые CNN, Двунаправленный LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN и CNN-основанную Модель Внимания (CA). Наша система получает средний балл корреляции Пирсона 0,682 в подзадаче EI-reg и средний балл корреляции Пирсона 0,784 в подзадаче V-reg, который занимает 17-е место среди 48 систем в EI-reg и 19-е место среди 38 систем в V-reg.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर ट्वीट्स में प्रभाव के लिए एक विधि प्रस्तुत करता है, जो स्वचालित रूप से भावनाओं की तीव्रता और ट्वीट्स की भावना की तीव्रता को निर्धारित करने का कार्य है। प्रभाव शब्द भावना से संबंधित श्रेणियों जैसे क्रोध, भय, आदि को संदर्भित करता है। इमो-टशन की तीव्रता को [0, 1] में एक वास्तविक मूल्यवान स्कोर में परिमाणित करने की आवश्यकता है। हम सीएनएन, द्विदिश एलएसटीएम (बीएलएसटीएम), एलएसटीएम-सीएनएन और सीएनएन-आधारित ध्यान मॉडल (सीए) चार अलग-अलग गहरी सीखने के तरीकों सहित एक एन-सेम्बल सिस्टम का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे सिस्टम को सबटास्क ईआई-रेग में 0.682 का औसत पियर्सन सहसंबंध स्कोर और सबटास्क वी-रेग में 0.784 का औसत पियर्सन सहसंबंध स्कोर मिलता है, जो ईआई-रेग में 48 प्रणालियों के बीच 17 वें स्थान पर है और वी-रेग में 38 प्रणालियों में से 19 वें स्थान पर है।', 'zh': '本文发一推文,即自定情推文之情。 术语动者,情之类也,怒惧之类也。 情强须量化[0,1]中实分。 建一en-semble之统,包四深之法,CNN双向LSTM(BLSTM),LSTM-CNN基于CNN(CA)。 子职 EI-reg 均 Pearson 关分为 0.682,子职 V-reg 中均 Pearson 关分 0.784,EI-reg 48 位排名第 17 , V-reg 38 位。', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo modh i láthair le haghaidh Affect in Tweets, arb é an tasc é chun déine na mothúcháin agus déine meon na tweets a chinneadh go huathoibríoch. Tagraíonn an téarma tionchar do chatagóirí a bhaineann le mothúcháin amhail fearg, eagla, etc. Ní mór déine na mothúchán a chainníochtú i scór fíorluachmhar i [0, 1]. Molaimid córas en-semble lena n-áirítear ceithre mhodh dhifriúla foghlama domhain, is iad sin CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN agus samhail Airde CNN-bhunaithe (CA). Faigheann ár gcóras meánscór comhghaolaithe Pearson de 0.682 san fhothasc EI-reg agus meánscór comhghaolaithe Pearson de 0.784 i bhfothasc V-reg, atá sa 17ú háit i measc 48 córas in EI-reg agus 19ú i measc 38 córas i V-reg.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს შესაძლებლობის გარეშე ტევიტებში, რომელიც არის საქმე, რომ ავტომატურად განსაზღვრება ემოციების ინტენსტიურობა და ტევიტების ინტენსტიურობა. ტერმინის გამოსახულება განსახულებულია ემოციონის შესახებ კატეგორია, როგორც ძალიან, შიშვილი და განსახულებულია. ემოციონის ინტენსტიფიკაცია უნდა კვანტიფიკაცია მნიშვნელოვანი წერტილებ ჩვენ ჩვენ წარმოდგინეთ en-semble სისტემა, რომელიც შვიდი განსხვავებული განსწავლების მეტი, რომელიც CNN, ორდირექციონალური LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN და CNN-based Attention Model (CA). ჩვენი სისტემა მიიღება საშუალო ფერსონის კორელაციის 0,682 წერტილი EI-reg-ში და საშუალო ფერსონის კორელაციის წერტილი 0,784 წერტილი V-reg-ში, რომელიც 17 წერტილი 48 სისტემაში EI-reg-ში და 19 წერტილი 38 სისტემაში V-reg-ში.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az Affect in Tweets módszerét, amely a feladat, hogy automatikusan meghatározza az érzelmek intenzitását és a tweetek érzelmeinek intenzitását. A hatás kifejezés olyan érzelmi kategóriákra utal, mint a düh, a félelem stb. Az érzelmek intenzitását valós értékű pontszámmá kell számszerűsíteni [0, 1]. Javasolunk egy en-semble rendszert, amely négy különböző mélytanulási módszert tartalmaz, amelyek a CNN, a kétirányú LSTM (BLSTM), az LSTM-CNN és a CNN alapú figyelem modell (CA). Rendszerünk átlagos Pearson korrelációs pontszámot kapott az EI-reg résztevékenységben 0,682 és átlagos Pearson korrelációs pontszámot a V-reg résztevékenységben 0,784, ami a 17. helyen áll az EI-reg 48 rendszer közül, a 19. helyen a V-reg 38 rendszer közül.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un metodo per Affect in Tweets, che è il compito di determinare automaticamente l'intensità delle emozioni e l'intensità del sentimento dei tweet. Il termine effetto si riferisce a categorie correlate alle emozioni come rabbia, paura, ecc. L'intensità delle emozioni deve essere quantificata in un punteggio reale stimato in [0, 1]. Proponiamo un sistema en-semble che comprende quattro diversi metodi di deep learning che sono CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN e un modello di attenzione basato su CNN (CA). Il nostro sistema ottiene un punteggio medio di correlazione Pearson di 0,682 nel sottotask EI-reg e un punteggio medio di correlazione Pearson di 0,784 nel sottotask V-reg, che si colloca 17esimo tra 48 sistemi in EI-reg e 19esimo tra 38 sistemi in V-reg.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια μέθοδο για την Επίδραση στα Τουίτερ, η οποία είναι το καθήκον να καθορίσει αυτόματα την ένταση των συναισθημάτων και την ένταση του συναισθήματος των tweets. Ο όρος επίδραση αναφέρεται σε κατηγορίες που σχετίζονται με συναισθήματα όπως θυμός, φόβος κ.λπ. Η ένταση των συναισθημάτων πρέπει να ποσοτικοποιηθεί σε μια πραγματική αποτίμηση σε [0, 1]. Προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα που περιλαμβάνει τέσσερις διαφορετικές μεθόδους βαθιάς μάθησης, οι οποίες είναι αμφίδρομη και βασισμένη σε ένα μοντέλο προσοχής (CA). Το σύστημά μας λαμβάνει μια μέση βαθμολογία συσχέτισης Pearson 0.682 στην υποταγή EI-reg και μια μέση βαθμολογία συσχέτισης Pearson 0.784 στην υποταγή V-reg, η οποία κατατάσσεται 17η μεταξύ 48 συστημάτων EI-reg και 19η μεταξύ 38 συστημάτων V-reg.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan kaedah untuk Affect dalam Tweets, yang adalah tugas untuk menentukan secara automatik intensiti emosi dan intensiti perasaan tweet. Terma pengaruh merujuk kepada kategori berkaitan emosi seperti kemarahan, ketakutan, dll. Intensiti emosi perlu dikwantifikasikan ke dalam skor nilai sebenar dalam [0, 1]. Kami cadangkan sistem dalam-semble termasuk empat kaedah belajar dalam yang berbeza yang adalah CNN, LSTM dua arah (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN dan model Perhatian berasaskan CNN (CA). Sistem kita mendapat skor korelasi Pearson rata-rata 0.682 dalam subtask EI-reg dan skor korelasi Pearson rata-rata 0.784 dalam subtask V-reg, yang berturut-turut ke-17 diantara 48 sistem dalam EI-reg dan ke-19 diantara 38 sistem dalam V-reg.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз tweets тізімдерінде әсер ететін әдісін көрсетеді. Бұл тапсырма, автоматты түрде емоциялардың және tweets сезімдерінің қанықтығын анықтау үшін тапсырма. Терменің әсері емоциялық санаттарына сәйкес келген санаттарды, мысалы, ыққыр, қорқыныш және т. б. көңіл- көңіл- көңіл тәжірибесі [0, 1] дегенде шын мәнді санаттарына тең Біз CNN, Екі бағытталған LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN және CNN негіздеген Attention моделі (CA) түрінде төрт түрлі түрлі оқыту әдістерін қолданатын жүйесін ұсынамыз. Біздің жүйемізде орташа Персондың кореляциясы 0,682 деген EI-reg жүйесінде және Персондың орташа кореляциясы 0,784 деген V-reg суретінде болады, ол EI-reg жүйесінде 17-ші жүйесінде және 19-ші жүйесінде V-reg жүйесінде 38-ші жүйес', 'mk': 'This paper presents a method for Affect in Tweets, which is the task to automatically determine the intensity of emotions and intensity of sentiment of tweets.  Терминот влијание се однесува на категории поврзани со емоциите како што се лутината, стравот итн. Интензитетот на емоциите мора да се квантификува во реална оценка во [0, 1]. Ние предложуваме систем на собирање, вклучувајќи четири различни методи на длабоко учење кои се CNN, двоупотребни LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN и модел на внимание (CA) базиран на CNN. Нашиот систем добива просечна оценка за корелација на Пирсон од 0,682 во субпрашањето Ел-рег и просечна оценка за корелација на Пирсон од 0,784 во субпрашањето В-рег, која се рангира на 17-тото место меѓу 48 системи во Ел-рег и 19-тото место меѓу 38 системи во В-рег.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയെ കൊണ്ടുവന്നിരിക്കുന്നു. അതാണ് വികാരങ്ങളുടെ ഉള്ളിലും തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നത്.  വാക്ക് പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നത് വികാരങ്ങളുടെ വിഭാഗങ്ങളെപ്പോലെയാണ്, കോപത്തിനെയും ഭയത്തെയും പോലെയുള്ള വിഭാഗങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് ഉദ്ദേശിക നാലു വ്യത്യസ്ത ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കാനുള്ള രീതികളുണ്ടാകുന്ന ഒരു സെമിബിള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d നിന്നും നാം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് സിNN, ബൈഡഡയല ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d സാധാരണ പീര്\u200dസണ്\u200d കോര്\u200dട്ടിക്കോര്\u200dട്ട് സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് 0.682 ഉള്ള സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് കിട്ടുന്നു. സബ്ബസ്സില്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ പീര്\u200dസണ്\u200d കോര്\u200dട്ടിക്കോര്\u200dട്ട് സ്കോര്\u200d 0', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ein metode for effekt i tweets, som er oppgåva å automatisk bestemme intensitet for følelser og intensitet for tweets. Uttrykket påvirkar refererer til emosjonsrelaterte kategoriar, slik som anger, frykt osv. Intensiteten av emosjoner må bli kvantifisert i eit verkeleg verdi poeng i [0, 1]. Vi foreslår eit en-semble system inkludert fire ulike dype læringsmetodar som er CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN og ein CNN-basert Attention model (CA). Sistemet vårt får eit gjennomsnittlig Pearson-korrelasjonspoeng med 0,682 i underspørjinga EI-reg og ein gjennomsnittlig Pearson-korrelasjonspoeng med 0,784 i underspørjinga V-reg, som rankerer 17 mellom 48 systemer i EI-reg og 19 mellom 38 systemer i V-reg.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta metodu għall-Affett fit-Tweets, li huwa l-kompitu li jiddetermina awtomatikament l-intensità tal-emozzjonijiet u l-intensità tas-sentiment tat-tweets. L-effett tat-terminu jirreferi għal kategoriji relatati mal-emozzjonijiet bħal rabja, biża’, eċċ. L-intensità tal-emozzjonijiet trid tiġi kkwantifikata f’punteġġ ta’ valur reali fi [0, 1]. Aħna nipproponu sistema ta’ assemblaġġ li tinkludi erba’ metodi differenti ta’ tagħlim profond li huma CNN, LSTM Bidirezzjonali (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN u mudell ta’ Attenzjoni bbażat fuq CNN (CA). Our system gets an average Pearson correlation score of 0.682 in the subtask EI-reg and an average Pearson correlation score of 0.784 in subtask V-reg, which ranks 17th among 48 systems in EI-reg and 19th among 38 systems in V-reg.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono metodę Affect in Tweets, która polega na automatycznym określeniu intensywności emocji i intensywności sentymentów tweetów. Termin efekt odnosi się do kategorii związanych z emocjami, takich jak gniew, strach itp. Intensywność emocji należy określić ilościowo w rzeczywistym wyniku w [0, 1]. Proponujemy system en-semble obejmujący cztery różne metody głębokiego uczenia, którymi są CNN, dwukierunkowy LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN oraz model uwagi oparty na CNN (CA). Nasz system otrzymuje średni wynik korelacji Pearsona 0,682 w podzadaniu EI-reg oraz średni wynik korelacji Pearsona 0,784 w podzadaniu V-reg, który zalicza się XVII wśród 48 systemów EI-reg i XIX wśród 38 systemów V-reg.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Твитт дээр нөлөөлдөг зүйлсийг харуулдаг. Энэ бол сэтгэл хөдлөл, мэдрэмжтэй сэтгэл хөдлөлийг автоматаар тодорхойлох зорилго юм. Үүний нөлөө нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн холбогдолтой хэсэг, уур, айдас, т.д. Бид энзимблийн системийг санал болгож, CNN, хоёр шугам LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN болон CNN-д суурилсан удирдлага загвар юм. Бидний систем Персон холбоотой дундаж 0.682 тооны EI-reg-д дундаж Персон холбоотой тооны 0.784 тооны V-reg-д дундаж хуваалцах тооны хувьд байна. Энэ нь EI-reg-д 48 системийн холбоотой 17-р тооны хувьд, V-reg-д 38 системийн 19-р тооны холбоотой.', 'lt': 'This paper presents a method for Affect in Tweets, which is the task to automatically determine the intensity of emotions and intensity of sentiment of tweets.  Terminas poveikis reiškia su emocijomis susijusias kategorijas, pvz., pyktis, baimė ir t. t. emocijų intensyvumas turi būti kiekybiškai įvertintas į tikrąjį įvertintą rezultatą [0, 1]. Siūlome rinkimo sistemą, apimančią keturis skirtingus gilaus mokymosi metodus: CNN, dvikrypčių LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN ir CNN pagrįstą dėmesio model į (CA). Mūsų sistema gauna vidutinį Pearson koreliacijos tašką 0,682 EI-reg pakopoje ir vidutinį Pearson koreliacijos tašką 0,784 V-reg pakopoje, kuris yra 17-asis iš 48 EI-reg sistemų ir 19-asis iš 38 V-reg sistemų.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o metodă pentru Afect în Tweets, care este sarcina de a determina automat intensitatea emoțiilor și intensitatea sentimentului tweet-urilor. Termenul afect se referă la categorii legate de emoții, cum ar fi furia, frica, etc. Intensitatea emoțiilor trebuie cuantificată într-un scor valoros real în [0, 1]. Propunem un sistem en-semble care include patru metode diferite de învățare profundă, care sunt CNN, LSTM bidirecțional (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN și un model de atenție bazat pe CNN (CA). Sistemul nostru obține un scor mediu de corelație Pearson de 0.682 în subactivitatea EI-reg și un scor mediu de corelație Pearson de 0.784 în subactivitatea V-reg, care se situează pe locul 17 în rândul 48 de sisteme în EI-reg și pe locul 19 în rândul 38 de sisteme în V-reg.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව ට්විට්ස් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒක තමයි ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන්ම තත්වයන්ගේ හැඟීමක් සහ තවත්වයක් තියෙනවා. අවශ්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ විදියට සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සංවේදනය, බය, ඉතින්. emo-tion අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඒ ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ CNN, දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN සහ CNN-අධාරිත සැල අපේ පද්ධතිය පියර්සන් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් 0.682 වෙනුවෙන් EI-reg සමාන්\u200dය පියර්සන් සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් 0.784 වෙනුවෙන් V-reg සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙනවා, ඒක EI-reg ස', 'so': "Qoraalkan wuxuu soo saaraa qaab ay ku saabsan af-faa'iido ee Tweetka, taas oo ah shuqul ay si automati u go’aan dhaqdhaqaaqa fikrada iyo daryeelka labada tweetka. Ereyga saameyn ku yeelan karo kooxo la xiriira hissiga sida xanaaq, cabsi, etc. Xisaabta fikrada waa in la qiimeeyo qiimaha dhabta ah[0, 1] Waxaan soo jeedaynaa nidaam hal-semi ah, kuwaas oo ah afar qaab waxbarasho oo aad u kala duduwan oo ah CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN iyo model Attention based CNN (CA). Isticmaddeena wuxuu helaa qiimaha isku xirka Pearson oo ugu dhexeeya 0.682 xiliga subaxda EI-reg iyo darajada Pearson isku xiriirta 0.784 oo ku qoran subtask V-reg, taasoo ka mid ah 48 nidaam EI-reg iyo 19aad oo ka mid ah 38 nidaam V-reg.", 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja metodu za uticaj na tweets, koji je zadatak da automatski utvrdi intenzitet emocija i intenzitet osjećaja tweets. Termin uticaja se odnosi na kategorije vezane sa emocijama kao što su bijes, strah i tako dalje. Intenzitet emocijama mora biti kvantificirana u pravi vrijedni rezultat u [0, 1]. Predlažemo sistem u sembolu uključujući četiri različite metode dubokog učenja koje su CNN, dvosmjerno LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN i model pažnje na CNN-u (CA). Naš sistem dobija prosječan rezultat korelacije Pearsona od 0,682 u podpitanju EI-reg i prosječan rezultat korelacije Pearsona od 0,784 u podpitanju V-reg, koji rankuje 17 među 48 sistemima EI-reg i 19 među 38 sistemima V-reg.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ٹویٹوں میں اثرات کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے، جس کا تابع ہے تاویٹوں کے احساسات کی مضبوطی اور مضبوطی کی مضبوطی کو اپنے ساتھ مقرر کرنے کے لئے۔ تفصیل کا تفصیل احساسات کے متعلق قسموں کی نسبت ہے جیسے غصہ، خوف، اور اگلے. احساسات کی تفصیل کی ضرورت ہے کہ ایک حقیقی ارزش اسکور میں مقدار کیا جائے [0,1]. ہم ایک ان-سمبل سیسٹم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں چار مختلف عمیق سیکھنے کی طریقے جو CNN، دو دقیق LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN اور CNN-based attention model (CA) ہیں. ہمارے سیستم میں ایک متوسط پیرسون کی تعلق score 0.682 ہے EI-reg میں اور ایک متوسط پیرسون کی تعلق score 0.784 ہے V-reg میں، جو EI-reg میں 48 سیستم میں 17 درجہ ہے اور 19 درجہ میں V-reg میں 38 سیستم میں ہے.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en metod för Affect in Tweets, som är uppgiften att automatiskt bestämma intensiteten av känslor och intensiteten av känslor i tweets. Termen påverkan avser känslorelaterade kategorier såsom ilska, rädsla etc. Emotionernas intensitet måste kvantifieras till en verkligt värderad poäng i [0, 1]. Vi föreslår ett system med fyra olika djupinlärningsmetoder som CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN och en CNN-baserad Attention Model (CA). Vårt system får en genomsnittlig Pearson korrelationspoäng på 0,682 i deluppgiften EI-reg och en genomsnittlig Pearson korrelationspoäng på 0,784 i deluppgiften V-reg, som rankas 17:e bland 48 system i EI-reg och 19:e bland 38 system i V-reg.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்திற்கு தாங்கள் தானாகவே தெரிந்து கொள்ளும் முறையை தேர்வு செய்கிறது, அது தானாகவே தேவையான உணர்வுகள் மற்றும் தெளிவுப இந்த வாக்கியம் உணர்வுடன் தொடர்புடைய வகுப்புகளை குறிக்கும் கோபம், பயம், மற்றும் போன்றுள்ளது. உணர்வுகளின் உணர்வுகள் உண்மையான மதிப்புள்ளிய நாம் நான்கு வேறு வித்தியாசமான ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முறைமையை நிரூபிக்கிறோம். அது CNN, இருதிசை LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM- CNN மற்றும் CNN-அடிப்படைய எங்கள் கணினியில் சராசரி பீர்சன் இணைப்பு மதிப்பு 0.682 கிடைக்கும் துணை பணியில் EI-reg மற்றும் ஒரு சராசரி பீர்சன் இணைப்பு மதிப்பு 0.784 துணை பணி V-reg ல், 48 முறைமைகளில் 17 முறைமைகளில் 17', 'uz': "This paper presents a method for Affect in Tweets, which is the task to automatically determine the intensity of emotions and intensity of sentiment of tweets.  Bu so'z hissiyotga bog'liq turlariga, cadh, қўрқиш, etc. hissiyalarning eng muhimi qiymatga qarshi kerak. Biz boshqa o'rganish usullari CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN va CNN asosida taʼminlovchi modeli (CA) bo'lgan to'rt boshqa o'rganish usullarini tahlil qilamiz. Bizning tizimimizda EI-regda o'zgarishga ega bo'ladigan 0.682 darajaga o'rtacha Pearson bog'liq scori va sub-vazifa V-regda o'rtacha 0.784 darajaga ega bo'ladi. U 48 tizimdagi, EI-reg va 38 tizimdagi 38 tizimdagi 7-yettidan birinchi darajada bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này là một phương pháp tác động trong Tweet, nhiệm vụ của chúng ta là tự động xác định độ mạnh của cảm xúc và độ mạnh của tình cảm trên Twitter. Thuật ngữ ảnh hưởng là những phân loại có liên quan đến cảm xúc như tức giận, sợ hãi, v. Sự tăng cường cảm xúc cần được định lượng thành một số điểm giá trị thực sự trong (0, 1). Chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống có thể lắp ráp bao gồm bốn phương pháp học sâu khác nhau là CNN, cử tri LSTM (Bloody M), LSTM-CNN và một mô hình chú ý trên CNN. Hệ thống của chúng tôi có một điểm tương quan giữa Pearson của 0.682 trong subtitle Ei-Reg và một điểm tương quan giữa 0.784 với phụ đề V-Reg trung bình, thứ bảy nằm trong số tám tám hệ thống đường El-Reg và số chín trong 38 hệ thống V-reg.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя метод за Афект в туитове, който е задачата автоматично да определи интензивността на емоциите и интензивността на сентимента на туитовете. Терминът афект се отнася до свързани с емоциите категории като гняв, страх и т.н. Интензивността на емоциите трябва да бъде количествено измерена в реална оценка в [0, 1]. Предлагаме система за електронно обучение, включваща четири различни метода за дълбоко обучение, които са двупосочен модел на внимание. Нашата система получава средна корелационна оценка на Пиърсън от 0.682 в подзадачата и средна корелационна оценка на Пиърсън от 0.784 в подзадачата която се нарежда на 17-о място сред 48 системи в Ей-рег и на 19-о място сред 38 системи в Ей-рег.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert een methode voor Affect in Tweets, die de taak is om automatisch de intensiteit van emoties en intensiteit van sentiment van tweets te bepalen. De term affect verwijst naar emotie gerelateerde categorieën zoals woede, angst, enz. Intensiteit van emoties moet worden gekwantificeerd in een reële waarde score in [0, 1]. We stellen een en-semble systeem voor met vier verschillende deep learning methodes: CNN, Bidirectioneel LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN en een CNN-gebaseerd Attention model (CA). Ons systeem krijgt een gemiddelde Pearson correlatiescore van 0.682 in de subtaak EI-reg en een gemiddelde Pearson correlatiescore van 0.784 in subtaak V-reg, die 17e rangschikt onder 48 systemen in EI-reg en 19e onder 38 systemen in V-reg.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja metodu za utjecaj na Tweets, koji je zadatak automatski određivati intenzitet emocija i intenzitet osjećaja tweets. Termin utjecaja se odnosi na kategorije povezane s emocijama poput bijesa, straha itd. Intenzitet emocijama mora biti kvantificirana u pravi vrijedni rezultat u [0, 1]. Predlažemo sistem u sembolu uključujući četiri različite metode dubokog učenja koje su CNN, dvosmjerno LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN i model pažnje na CNN-u (CA). Naš sustav dobija prosječan rezultat korelacije Pearsona od 0,682 u podpitanju EI-reg i prosječan rezultat korelacije Pearsona od 0,784 u podpitanju V-reg, koji rank 17 među 48 sustavima EI-reg i 19 među 38 sustavima V-reg.', 'da': 'Dette papir præsenterer en metode til påvirkning i tweets, som er opgaven at automatisk bestemme intensiteten af følelser og intensiteten af følelser af tweets. Begrebet påvirkning refererer til følelsesrelaterede kategorier såsom vrede, frygt osv. Emotionernes intensitet skal kvantificeres til en reel værdi score i [0, 1]. Vi foreslår et en-semble system, der omfatter fire forskellige deep learning metoder, som er CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN og en CNN-baseret Attention model (CA). Vores system får en gennemsnitlig Pearson korrelationsscore på 0,682 i subaktiviteten EI-reg og en gennemsnitlig Pearson korrelationsscore på 0,784 i subaktiviteten V-reg, som rangerer 17. blandt 48 systemer i EI-reg og 19. blandt 38 systemer i V-reg.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt eine Methode für Affect in Tweets vor, die die Aufgabe ist, automatisch die Intensität von Emotionen und Intensität der Stimmung von Tweets zu bestimmen. Der Begriff Affekt bezieht sich auf emotionsbezogene Kategorien wie Wut, Angst, etc. Die Intensität der Emotionen muss in einem realen Wert in [0, 1] quantifiziert werden. Wir schlagen ein en-semble System vor, das vier verschiedene Deep Learning Methoden umfasst: CNN, Bidirektionales LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN und ein CNN-basiertes Aufmerksamkeitsmodell (CA). Unser System erhält einen durchschnittlichen Pearson Korrelationswert von 0,682 im Teilauftrag EI-reg und einen durchschnittlichen Pearson Korrelationswert von 0,784 im Teilauftrag V-reg, der 17th unter 48 Systemen in EI-reg und 19th unter 38 Systemen in V-reg rangiert.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک روش برای تاثیر در تویتها نشان می دهد، که وظیفه برای خودکار تعیین شدت احساسات و شدت احساسات تویتها است. تأثیر عبارت به عنوان گونه\u200cهای رابطه\u200cی احساسات مثل خشم، ترس و غیر از آن ارزش می\u200cدهد. استعداد احساسات باید به عنوان یک امتیاز ارزش واقعی در [0، 1] مقدار داده شود. ما یک سیستم en-semble پیشنهاد می کنیم که شامل چهار روش یادگیری عمیق متفاوت است که CNN، LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN و یک مدل توجه بر اساس CNN (CA). سیستم ما یک امتیاز متوسط ارتباط پیرسون از 0.682 در پایین\u200cپرس EI-reg و یک امتیاز ارتباط متوسط پیرسون از 0.784 در پایین\u200cپرس V-reg، که در پایین\u200cپرس ۱۷م میان ۴۸ سیستم در EI-reg و ۱۹م میان سیستم\u200cهای V-reg است.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta mbinu za Affect kwenye twita, ambazo ni jukumu la kuamua kwa wenyewe kutambua nia ya hisia na nia ya twita. Neno linaloathiri inamaanisha makundi yanayohusiana na hisia kama vile hasira, hofu, etc. Uhisia wa hisia lazima kuhakikisha kuwa vipimo vya thamani kweli katika [0, 1] Tunapendekeza mfumo wa pili ikiwa ni pamoja na mbinu nne tofauti za kujifunza za ndani ambazo ni CNN, LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN na modeli ya kusikiliza nchini CNN (CA). Mfumo wetu unapata kiwango cha wastani cha mahusiano ya Pearson ya 0.682 katika mfumo wa EI na kiwango cha wastani cha mahusiano ya Pearson ya 0.784 katika mfumo wa subira V, ambao unakuwa na umri wa 17 kati ya mfumo 48 katika Uchumo wa EI na 19 kati ya mfumo 38 katika mfumo wa V reg.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz tweets içinde Affect täzelikleri üçin bir yöntem görkezýär. Bu duýgularyň ýigrenligini we tweets duýgynyň görnüşligini otomatik bilen tanyşdyrmak üçin zady. Termin täsiri duýgular bilen baglanyşyk, gorky we ýagdaýda ýaly çagalar ýaly. Emotisiýalar üçin hakyky mykdarlyk notlara görä ölmeli bolar [0, 1]. Biz CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN we CNN daýan ýan Attention nusgasyny bar bir sistemi teklip edip görýäris Biziň sistemimizde orta Pearson korelaciýasynyň 0,682 अंतर EI-reg we orta Pearson korelaciýasynyň 0,784 अंतर paýlaşdyrylýar, bu da 48 sistemlerde EI reg we 19-nji sistemlerde V-reg derejesinde 17-nji derejesi bar.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n metode vir Affect in Tweets, wat is die taak om automaties die intensiteit van emosies en intensiteit van sentiment van tweets te bepaal. Die term invloek verwys na emosie-verwante kategorie soos toorn, vrees, ensfh. Intensiteit van emo-tions moet in 'n regte waardeerde telling in [0, 1]. Ons voorstel 'n en-semble stelsel insluitend vier verskillende diep leer metodes wat CNN is, tweederigting LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN en 'n CNN-gebaseerde aandag model (CA). Ons stelsel kry 'n gemiddelde Pearson korrelasie poeier van 0,682 in die subtfraag EI-reg en 'n gemiddelde Pearson korrelasie poeier van 0,784 in subtfraag V-reg, wat rank 17de onder 48 stelsels in EI-reg en 19de onder 38 stelsels in V-reg.", 'id': 'Kertas ini menunjukkan metode untuk Affect in Tweets, yang adalah tugas untuk secara otomatis menentukan intensitas emosi dan intensitas sentimen tweet. Terma efek berarti kategori yang berhubungan dengan emosi seperti kemarahan, ketakutan, dll. Intensitas emosi perlu dikwantifikasikan menjadi skor nilai nyata dalam [0, 1]. We propose an en-semble system including four different deep learning methods which are CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN and a CNN-based Attention model (CA).  Sistem kita mendapatkan nilai korelasi Pearson rata-rata 0,682 dalam subtask EI-reg dan nilai korelasi Pearson rata-rata 0,784 dalam subtask V-reg, yang berturut-turut ke-17 diantara 48 sistem dalam EI-reg dan ke-19 diantara 38 sistem dalam V-reg.', 'ko': '본고는 추문의 감정 분석 방법, 즉 추문의 감정 강도와 감정 강도를 자동으로 확정하는 방법을 제시했다.감정이란 분노, 두려움 등 정서와 관련된 유형을 가리킨다. 정서의 강도는 [0,1]의 실치 점수로 양적화해야 한다.우리는 네 가지 서로 다른 깊이 있는 학습 방법을 포함하는 기억 시스템, 즉 CNN, 쌍방향 LSTM(BLSTM), LSTM-CNN과 CNN 기반의 주의 모델(CA)을 제시했다.우리 시스템은 하위 퀘스트 EI-reg에서 필슨 관련 평균 점수가 0.682, 하위 퀘스트 V-reg에서 필슨 관련 점수가 0.784로 EI-reg의 48개 시스템 중 17위, V-reg의 38개 시스템 중 19위를 차지했다.', 'hy': 'This paper presents a method for Affect in Tweets, which is the task to automatically determine the intensity of emotions and intensity of sentiment of tweets.  Այս տերմինը վերաբերում է զգացմունքների հետ կապված կատեգորիաներին, ինչպիսիք են զայրույթը, վախը և այլն: Զգացմունքների ինտենսիվությունը պետք է չափեցվի իրական գնահատված գնահատականի մեջ [0, 1]: Մենք առաջարկում ենք հավաքական համակարգ, ներառյալ չորս տարբեր խորը ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներ, որոնք CNN-ն են, երկուղղային LSMT-ը (ԲԼՍՏՄ), LSMT-ը և CNN-ի հիմնված ուշադրության մոդելը (ՔԱ). Մեր համակարգը ստանում է ընդհանուր Պիրսոնի հաղորդակցման գնահատականը 0,682-ի, ընդհանուր Պիրսոնի հաղորդակցման գնահատականը 0,784-ի, ընդհանուր Պիրսոնի հաղորդակցման գնահատականը 0,784-ի, ընդհանուր Պիրսոնի հաղորդակցման գնահատականը 17-րդ է Ա-Ռեգ', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি টুইটে প্রভাবিত একটি পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছে, যা টুইটের অনুভূতি এবং অনুভূতির গভীর সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণ করার কাজ। এই শব্দের প্রভাবিত হচ্ছে অনুভূতির সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট বিভাগ যেমন রাগ, ভয়, ইত্যাদি। অনুভূতির সাথে অনুভূতি সত্যিকারের মূল্যবোধের স্কোরে পরি আমরা একটি সেমেবল ব্যবস্থা প্রস্তাব করি যার মধ্যে চারটি ভিন্ন ভিন্ন গভীর শিক্ষা পদ্ধতি রয়েছে যার মধ্যে রয়েছে সিএনএন, বাইডেডিয়াল এলএসএমএস (বিএলস্টিম),  আমাদের সিস্টেম ইআই-রিগের সাবক্ষেত্রে সাধারণত পেয়ারসনের সংযোগ স্কোর পেয়েছে যা ভি-রিগের মধ্যে ৪৮ সিস্টেমের মধ্যে ১৭ সাল এবং ১৯ সিস্টেমের মধ্যে ৩৮ সিস্টেমের মধ্যে।', 'sq': 'Kjo letër paraqet një metodë për Affect in Tweets, e cila është detyra për të përcaktuar automatikisht intensitetin e emocioneve dhe intensitetin e ndjenjave të tweeteve. Termi ndikimi referohet në kategori të lidhura me emocionet të tilla si zemërimi, frika, etj. Intensiteti i emocioneve duhet të quantifikohet në një pikë të vlerësuar reale në [0, 1]. Ne propozojmë një sistem të mbledhjes duke përfshirë katër metoda të ndryshme të mësimit të thellë që janë CNN, LSTM dy-drejtues (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN dhe një model i vëmendjes me bazë në CNN (CA). Sistemi ynë merr një pikë mesatare korrelacioni të Pearsonit 0.682 në nënpyetjen EI-reg dhe një pikë mesatare korrelacioni të Pearsonit 0.784 në nënpyetjen V-reg, e cila renditet e 17-ta midis 48 sistemeve në EI-reg dhe e 19-ta midis 38 sistemeve në V-reg.', 'am': 'ይህም ፕሮግራም የኢትዮጵያውያን አካባቢ እና የTwitteets ስሜት አካባቢ እና የአስብሰባዊ ስሜት ስሜት ማረጋገጥ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ የንግግሩ ግንኙነት እንደተጨማሪው ቁጣ፣ ፍርሃት፣ ተጨማሪ ክፍሎች ነው፡፡ CNN፣ Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM)፣ LSTM-CNN እና CNN-based የልዩ ጥልቅ ትምህርት ሥርዓት (CA) ያሉትን አራት ልዩ ልዩ ጥልቅ ትምህርት ማድረጉን እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የኢ.አ.', 'ca': "This paper presents a method for Affect in Tweets, which is the task to automatically determine the intensity of emotions and intensity of sentiment of tweets.  El terme afecte es refereix a categories relacionades amb les emocions, com la ira, la por, etc. La intensitat de les emocions s'ha de quantificar en una puntuació real valorada en [0, 1]. Proposem un sistema de simulació que inclou quatre mètodes d'aprenentatge profund diferents que són CNN, LSTM bidireccional (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN i un model d'atenció basat en CNN (CA). Our system gets an average Pearson correlation score of 0.682 in the subtask EI-reg and an average Pearson correlation score of 0.784 in subtask V-reg, which ranks 17th among 48 systems in EI-reg and 19th among 38 systems in V-reg.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja metodu za uticaj na Tweets, koji je zadatak da automatski utvrdi intenzitet emocija i intenzitet osjećaja tweets. Termin utjecaja se odnosi na kategorije povezanih sa emocijama poput bijesa, straha, itd. Intenzitet emocijama mora biti kvantificirana u pravi vrijedni rezultat u [0, 1]. Predlažemo sistem u sembolu uključujući četiri različite metode dubokog učenja koje su CNN, dvosmjerno LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN i model pažnje na CNN-u (CA). Naš sistem dobija prosječan rezultat korelacije Pearsona od 0,682 u podpitanju EI-reg i prosječan rezultat korelacije Pearsona od 0,784 u podpitanju V-reg, koji čini 17. među 48 sistema EI-reg i 19. među 38 sistema V-reg.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt Tweets içində müxtəlif bir yolu göstərir. Bu, duyguların şiddətini və twet duygularının şiddətini avtomatik olaraq təyin etmək məqsədilədir. Termin təsiri qəzəbi, qorxu və ya da hisslərlə bağlı kategoriyalara məlumat edir. Emotiyonların a ğırlığını gerçek qiymətli nöqtələrə hesablaması lazımdır [0, 1]. Biz en-semble sistemi CNN, iki yönəllik LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN və CNN-ə dayanan Attention modeli (CA) ilə birlikdə dörd müxtəlif öyrənmə metodlarını təklif edirik. Sistemimiz ortalama Pearson correlation score 0,682 EI-reg və ortalama Pearson correlation score 0,784 V-reg subtask sistemində, EI-reg sistemində 17-ci sistemi və V-reg sistemində 19-ci sistemi arasında.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje metodu Affect in Tweets, která je úkolem automaticky určit intenzitu emocí a intenzitu sentimentu tweetů. Pojem affect odkazuje na emoce související kategorie, jako je hněv, strach atd. Intenzita emocí je třeba kvantifikovat do reálného hodnotného skóre v [0, 1]. Navrhujeme en-semble systém zahrnující čtyři různé metody hlubokého učení, které jsou CNN, Bidirektionální LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN a CNN-based Attention model (CA). Náš systém získává průměrné Pearsonovo korelační skóre 0,682 v podúkolu EI-reg a průměrné Pearsonovo korelační skóre 0,784 v podúkolu V-reg, které řadí sedmnácté mezi 48 systémy v EI-reg a 19th mezi 38 systémy V-reg.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis on esitatud meetod Afect in Tweets, mille ülesanne on automaatselt määrata emotsioonide intensiivsus ja intensiivsus tweets. Mõiste mõju viitab emotsioonidega seotud kategooriatele, nagu viha, hirm jne. Emotsioonide intensiivsus tuleb kvantifitseerida reaalse väärtusega skooriks [0, 1]. Pakume välja en-semble süsteemi, mis sisaldab nelja erinevat sügavõppe meetodit, mis on CNN, kahesuunaline LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN ja CNN-põhine tähelepanu mudel (CA). Meie süsteem saab keskmise Pearsoni korrelatsiooni skoori 0,682 alaülesandes EI-reg ja keskmise Pearsoni korrelatsiooni skoori 0,784 alaülesandes V-reg, mis on 17. kohal 48 süsteemi seas EI-reg ja 19. kohal 38 süsteemi seas V-reg.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään menetelmä Affect in Tweets, jonka tehtävänä on määrittää automaattisesti tunteiden voimakkuus ja tunteiden voimakkuus tweeteissä. Termi affect viittaa tunteisiin liittyviin kategorioihin, kuten vihaan, pelkoon jne. Tunteiden voimakkuus on kvantifioitava todelliseksi arvopisteeksi [0,1]. Ehdotamme en-semble-järjestelmää, joka sisältää neljä erilaista syväoppimisen menetelmää, jotka ovat CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN ja CNN-pohjainen huomiomalli (CA). Järjestelmämme saa Pearsonin korrelaatiopisteen 0,682 alitehtävässä EI-reg ja Pearsonin korrelaatiopisteen 0,784 alitehtävässä V-reg, joka sijoittuu 17. sijalle 48 järjestelmästä EI-reg ja 19. sijalle 38 järjestelmästä V-reg.', 'jv': 'Awak iki rambarang nggawe sistem kanggo AfEffect nang Tuet, iki dadi nggawe ngubah automatik kuwi nggawe kalomongaké karo ingkang diolah sing tuwit. Perintah sing dipunangé diwehent karo iCalendar, akeh, ngdar, itl. Perintah penting-tions kudu siweh nyimpen kanggo kelompok barang kelompok in [0, 1] Awak dhéwé gunakake sistem semble sing gawe soko kat method sing wis dipun gawe nggawe metu gawe lan saiki, Bidirectial LTT M (blestM), LTT-M-MT lan model sing basa Atténtion (C). Sistem dhéwé éntuk perusahaan kelas perusahaan punika 0.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג שיטה להשפיעה בטוויטים, שהיא המשימה לקבוע באופן אוטומטי את האינטנסיביות של רגשות ואינטנסיביות של רגשות הטוויטים. המונח השפעה מתייחס לקטגוריות קשורות לרגשות כמו כעס, פחד, וכו"כ. האינטנסיבות של הרגשות צריכה לקוונט לתוך נקודת ערכה אמיתית ב [0, 1]. אנו מציעים מערכת תסמיכה כוללת ארבעה שיטות למידה עמוקה שונות הן CNN, LSTM שתי כיוונים (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN ומודל תשומת לב מבוסס CNN (CA). המערכת שלנו מקבלת נקודת תקשורת פירסון ממוצעת של 0.682 ב-EI-reg תחת השאלה והנקודת תקשורת פירסון ממוצעת של 0.784 ב-V-reg תחת השאלה, אשר מגוונת ב-17 בין 48 מערכות ב-EI-reg ו-19 בין 38 מערכות ב-V-reg.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena metoda za Afect in Tweets, katere naloga je samodejno določiti intenzivnost čustev in intenzivnost čustva tweetov. Izraz vpliv se nanaša na kategorije, povezane s čustvi, kot so jeza, strah itd. Intenzivnost emocij je treba kvantificirati v realno vrednoteno oceno v [0, 1]. Predlagamo en-semble sistem, ki vključuje štiri različne metode globokega učenja, ki so CNN, Dvosmerni LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN in CNN-based Attention model (CA). Naš sistem dobi povprečno Pearsonovo korelacijsko oceno 0,682 v podopravi EI-reg in povprečno Pearsonovo korelacijsko oceno 0,784 v podopravi V-reg, kar se uvršča na 17. med 48 sistemi EI-reg in 19. med 38 sistemi V-reg.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na ƙunsa da shirin Affect cikin Twitter, wannan aikin ya ƙayyade farat ɗaya ga hisoyi da ke cikin kashi na Twitter. Yakunan muhalli na kama da nau'i masu husũma da hiso kamar haske, tsoron, etc. Ana ƙayyade in ƙayyade matsayin hisia zuwa wani kima mai gaske cikin[0, 1]. Tuna goyyar da wani-semi, tare da wasu hanyõyi huɗu masu kara na ƙari, waɗand a ke CNN, BLstuM (BLSM), LStM-CNN da wata misãlai ga Attachment a kan CNN (CA). TsarinMu yana da nau'in Pearson mai yawan zargi na 0.682 a cikin aikin EI-reg da kuma yana da wata jama'a na Pearson mai girgije na 0.784 a sub-aikin V-reg, wanda ke daraja 17 na kasar 48 na kasar EI-reg da 19 na kasar 38 na cikin V-reg.", 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་Affect(Affect)དང་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། དེ་ནི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གཏན་སེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་སྒུ The term affect refers to emotion-related categories such as anger, fear, etc. Intensity of emo-tions need to be quantified into a real valued score in [0, 1]. We propose an en-semble system including four different deep learning methods which are CNN, Bidirectional LSTM (BLSTM), LSTM-CNN and a CNN-based Attention model (CA). ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱ་གཞུང་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཚད་0.682 ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'ARB-SEN at SemEval-2018 Task1 : A New Set of Features for Enhancing the Sentiment Intensity Prediction in Arabic Tweets', 'ar': 'ARB-SEN في SemEval-2018 Task1: مجموعة جديدة من الميزات لتعزيز التنبؤ بكثافة المعنويات في التغريدات العربية', 'es': 'ARB-SEN en la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Un nuevo conjunto de características para mejorar la predicción de la intensidad de los sentimientos en los tuits árabes', 'pt': 'ARB-SEN na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: um novo conjunto de recursos para aprimorar a previsão de intensidade de sentimento em tweets em árabe', 'fr': "ARB-SEN à la tâche1 de SEMEVAL-2018\xa0: un nouvel ensemble de fonctionnalités pour améliorer la prédiction de l'intensité du sentiment dans les tweets en arabe", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018 Task 1でのARB - SEN ：アラビア語ツイートの感情の強さ予測を強化するための新しい機能のセット', 'zh': 'ARB-SEN在SemEval-2018务1:惟新之功,以强阿拉伯语推文之情', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 Task1 पर ARB-SEN: अरबी ट्वीट्स में भावना तीव्रता की भविष्यवाणी को बढ़ाने के लिए सुविधाओं का एक नया सेट', 'ru': 'ARB-SEN на SemEval-2018 Task1: Новый набор функций для улучшения прогнозирования интенсивности настроений в арабских твитах', 'ga': 'ARB-SEN ag SemEval-2018 Tasc1: Sraith Nua Gnéithe chun an Tuar ar Dhéine Mointe a Fheabhsú in Tweets Araibis', 'el': 'Ένα νέο σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών για την ενίσχυση της πρόβλεψης έντασης συναισθημάτων στα αραβικά tweets', 'ka': 'ARB', 'hu': 'ARB-SEN a SemEval-2018 feladat1: Új funkciók készlete az érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzésének javítására arab tweetekben', 'it': "ARB-SEN a SemEval-2018 Task1: un nuovo insieme di funzionalità per migliorare la previsione dell'intensità del sentimento nei tweet arabi", 'kk': 'ARB- SEN жарым- 2018 тапсырма1: Араб tweets тізімдерінде сезімді қарау үшін жаңа қасиеттер жиыны', 'mk': 'АРБ-СЕН на SemEval-2018 задача1: Нов набор функции за подобрување на предвидувањата за интензитет на чувствата на арапските твитови', 'ms': 'ARB-SEN pada SemEval-2018 Tugas1: Set Features Baru untuk meningkatkan Prediksi Intensiti Sensan dalam Tweets Arab', 'mt': 'ARB-SEN f’SemEval-2018 Task1: Sett Ġdid ta’ Karatteristiċi għat-Titjib tat-Tbassir tal-Intensità tas-Sentiment fit-Tweets Għarab', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക്1: അറബി ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറിന്\u200dറെ സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ സെറ', 'mn': 'ARB-SEN at SemEval-2018 Task1: A New Set of Features for Enhancing the Sentiment Intensity Prediction in Arabic Tweets', 'no': 'ARB-SEN på semiEval-2018 oppgåve1: Eit ny set av funksjonar for å forstørra følgjande intensitet i arabiske tweeter', 'pl': 'ARB-SEN na SemEval-2018 Zadania1: Nowy zestaw funkcji służących poprawie przewidywania intensywności sentymentów w arabskich tweetach', 'sr': 'ARB-SEN na pola Evala-2018 zadatku1: Novi set karaktera za poboljšanje predviđanja sentimentalne intenzitete na arapskim tweetima', 'si': 'ARB-SEN at Halfeval-2018 Job1: A New set of Featuries for EnHanging the Sentiment Intensty Precdiction in Arab Tweets', 'so': 'ARB-SEN at SemEval-2018 Task1: A New Set of Features for enhancing the Sentiment Intensity Prediction in Arabic Tweets', 'sv': 'ARB-SEN p책 SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: En ny upps채ttning funktioner f철r att f철rb채ttra k채nselintensitetsprognosen i arabiska tweets', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task1 میں ARB-SEN: A New Set of Features for Enhancing the Sentiment Intensity Prediction in Arabic Tweets', 'ro': 'ARB-SEN la SemEval-2018 Task1: Un nou set de caracteristici pentru îmbunătățirea predicției intensității sentimentelor în tweeturile arabe', 'lt': 'ARB-SEN SemEval-2018 užduotis1: Naujas jautrumo intensyvumo prognozės arabų dviejuose gerinimo požymių rinkinys', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் ARB- SEN: அரபி Tweets மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான ஒரு புதிய அமைப்பு குணங்கள்1', 'uz': '1: Sentiment Intensity Dimethasini oshirish uchun yangi moslamalar', 'vi': 'ARB-Sen at SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task1: A new set of Featurs for improving the feeling Intensity prediction in Ả Rập Tweet', 'hr': 'ARB-SEN na zadatku pola Evala-2018-1: Novi skup Features za poboljšanje predviđanja osjetljivosti na arapskim tweetima', 'da': 'ARB-SEN på SemEval-2018 Opgave1: Et nyt sæt funktioner til at forbedre forudsigelsen af følelsesintensitet i arabiske tweets', 'nl': 'ARB-SEN op SemEval-2018 Taak1: Een nieuwe set functies voor het verbeteren van de gevoelsintensiteitsvoorspelling in Arabische Tweets', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Нов набор от функции за повишаване на прогнозирането на интензивността на сентимента в арабски туитове', 'de': 'ARB-SEN auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe1: Eine neue Reihe von Funktionen zur Verbesserung der Sentiment Intensity Vorhersage in arabischen Tweets', 'ko': 'ARB-sen, Sem Eval-2018 Task1에서의 강연: 아랍어 트윗에서 정서 강도 예측을 강화하는 새로운 기능', 'fa': 'ARB-SEN در تابع نیم Eval-2018 ۱: یک مجموعه جدید از ویتهای برای افزایش پیشنهاد هوشیاری احساساتی در Tweets عربی', 'sw': 'ARB-SEN katika Tamko la SemEval-2018: Mfumo mpya wa Tamko kwa Kuboresha Utawala wa Tamko kwa Kiarabu', 'id': 'ARB-SEN di SemEval-2018 Task1: Satu Set Features Baru untuk meningkatkan Prediksi Intensitas Sentiment dalam Tweets Arab', 'am': '1: A New Set of Features for enhancing the Sentiment Intensity Preference in Arabic Tweets', 'sq': 'ARB-SEN në SemEval-2018', 'hy': 'ARB-SEN-ը 2018 թվականի "Սեմվալ"-ի "Սեմվալ"-ի "Սեմվալ"-ի "Արաբական թվիթերում զգացմունքի ուժեղության կանխատեսումների զարգացման նոր հատկություն"1', 'az': 'ARB-SEN at SemEval-2018 Task1: A New Set of Features for Enhancing the Sentiment Intensity Prediction in Arabic Tweets', 'tr': 'ARB-SEN at SemEval-2018 Task1: A New Set of Features for Enhancing the Sentiment Intensity Prediction in Arabic Tweets', 'bs': 'ARB-SEN na zadatku pola Evala-2018-1: Novi skup karaktera za poboljšanje predviđanja sentimentalne intenzitete na arapskim tweetima', 'cs': 'ARB-SEN na SemEval-2018 Task1: Nová sada funkcí pro zlepšení predikce intenzity sentimentů v arabských tweetech', 'af': "Arb-SEN by SemEval-2018 Taak1: ' n Nuwe stel van eienskappe vir verbetering van die Sentiment Intensiteit voordeel in Arabiese Tweets", 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের আরবি-সেন: আরবী টুইটারে সেন্টাইমেন্টের সুবিধা বৃদ্ধির জন্য একটি নতুন বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'ca': 'ARB-SEN a SemEval-2018 Task1: Un nou conjunt de característiques per millorar la predicció de la intensitat del sentiment en tweets àrabs', 'fi': 'ARB-SEN SemEval-2018 tehtävässä 1: Uusi joukko ominaisuuksia tunteiden intensiteettiennusteen parantamiseksi arabialaisissa tweeteissä', 'et': 'ARB-SEN SemEval-2018 ülesandel 1: uus funktsioonide komplekt tunnete intensiivsuse prognoosi suurendamiseks araabia tweetides', 'jv': 'ARB', 'sk': 'ARB-SEN na nalogi SemEval-2018 1: Nov nabor funkcij za povečanje napovedi intenzivnosti sentimenta v arabskih tweetih', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'ARB-SEN ב SemEval-2018 Task1: A New Set of Features for Enhancing the Sentiment Intensity Prediction in Arabic Tweets', 'bo': 'ARB-SEN at SemEval-2018 Task1: A New Set of Features for Enhancing the Sentiment Intensity Prediction in Arabic Tweets'}
{'en': 'This article describes our proposed Arabic Sentiment Analysis system named ARB-SEN. This system is designed for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1 : Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN proposes two supervised models to estimate the sentiment intensity in Arabic tweets. Both models use a set of features including sentiment lexicon, negation, word embedding and emotion symbols features. Our system combines these features to assist the sentiment analysis task. ARB-SEN system achieves a correlation score of 0.720, ranking 6th among all participants in the valence intensity regression (V-reg) for the Arabic sub-task organized within the SemEval 2018 evaluation campaign.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه المقالة نظامنا المقترح لتحليل المشاعر العربية المسمى ARB-SEN. تم تصميم هذا النظام لورشة العمل الدولية حول التقييم الدلالي 2018 (SemEval-2018) ، المهمة 1: التأثير في التغريدات. يقترح ARB-SEN نموذجين خاضعين للإشراف لتقدير كثافة المشاعر في التغريدات العربية. يستخدم كلا النموذجين مجموعة من الميزات بما في ذلك معجم المشاعر والنفي ودمج الكلمات وخصائص رموز المشاعر. يجمع نظامنا بين هذه الميزات للمساعدة في مهمة تحليل المشاعر. حقق نظام ARB-SEN درجة ارتباط 0.720 ، ليحتل المرتبة السادسة بين جميع المشاركين في انحدار كثافة التكافؤ (V-reg) للمهمة الفرعية العربية التي تم تنظيمها ضمن حملة التقييم SemEval 2018.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema de Análise de Sentimentos Árabe proposto chamado ARB-SEN. Este sistema foi desenvolvido para o Workshop Internacional de Avaliação Semântica 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN propõe dois modelos supervisionados para estimar a intensidade do sentimento em tweets em árabe. Ambos os modelos usam um conjunto de recursos, incluindo léxico de sentimentos, negação, incorporação de palavras e recursos de símbolos de emoção. Nosso sistema combina esses recursos para auxiliar na tarefa de análise de sentimentos. O sistema ARB-SEN atinge uma pontuação de correlação de 0,720, ocupando o 6º lugar entre todos os participantes na regressão de intensidade de valência (V-reg) para a subtarefa árabe organizada dentro da campanha de avaliação SemEval 2018.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système d'analyse des sentiments en arabe, ARB-SEN. Ce système est conçu pour l'Atelier international sur l'évaluation sémantique 2018 (SemEval-2018), Tâche1\xa0: Affect dans les Tweets. ARB-SEN propose deux modèles supervisés pour estimer l'intensité du sentiment dans les tweets en arabe. Les deux modèles utilisent un ensemble de fonctionnalités, notamment le lexique des sentiments, la négation, l'intégration de mots et les symboles d'émotion. Notre système combine ces fonctionnalités pour faciliter la tâche d'analyse des sentiments. Le système ARB-SEN atteint un score de corrélation de 0,720, se classant au 6e rang parmi tous les participants à la régression de l'intensité de valence (V-reg) pour la sous-tâche arabe organisée dans le cadre de la campagne d'évaluation SemEval 2018.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro sistema propuesto de Análisis de Sentimiento Árabe llamado ARB-SEN. Este sistema está diseñado para el Taller Internacional de Evaluación Semántica 2018 (SemEval-2018), Tarea 1: Efecto en los Tweets. ARB-SEN propone dos modelos supervisados para estimar la intensidad del sentimiento en los tuits árabes. Ambos modelos utilizan un conjunto de características que incluyen funciones de léxico de sentimiento, negación, incrustación de palabras y símbolos de emoción. Nuestro sistema combina estas características para ayudar en la tarea de análisis de opiniones. El sistema ARB-SEN logra una puntuación de correlación de 0.720, ocupando el sexto lugar entre todos los participantes en la regresión de intensidad de valencia (V-reg) para la subtarea árabe organizada dentro de la campaña de evaluación SemEval 2018.', 'ja': 'この記事では、ARB - SENという名前の提案されたアラビア語感情分析システムについて説明します。このシステムは、セマンティック評価国際ワークショップ2018 （ SemEval -2018 ）のために設計されています。タスク1 ：ツイートに影響を与えます。ARB - SENは、アラビア語のツイートにおける感情の強さを推定するために、2つの監視モデルを提案しています。どちらのモデルも、センチメント辞書、否定、単語埋め込み、感情記号機能を含む一連の機能を使用しています。当社のシステムは、センチメント分析タスクを支援するためにこれらの機能を組み合わせています。ARB - SENシステムは、0.720の相関スコアを達成し、SemEval 2018評価キャンペーン内で組織されたアラビア語サブタスクの原子価強度回帰（ V - reg ）のすべての参加者の中で6位です。', 'zh': '本文引ARB-SEN阿拉伯语情析系统。 统者,2018年语义估国际研讨会(SemEval-2018)务1:推其影响而设计者也。 ARB-SEN建二监模以度阿拉伯语推文之情。 二模皆用一朋功能,包情词典,否,词嵌与情符号功能。 我们的系统了这些功能来助情分析。 ARB-SEN系统之相关性分为0.720,于SemEval 2018估阿拉伯语子任者效价强归(V-reg)所有参与者中排名第6位。', 'hi': 'यह लेख हमारे प्रस्तावित अरबी भावना विश्लेषण प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है जिसका नाम ARB-SEN है। यह प्रणाली सिमेंटिक मूल्यांकन 2018 (SemEval-2018) पर अंतर्राष्ट्रीय कार्यशाला के लिए डिज़ाइन की गई है, Task1: Tweets में प्रभाव। एआरबी-सेन ने अरबी ट्वीट्स में भावना की तीव्रता का अनुमान लगाने के लिए दो पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल का प्रस्ताव दिया है। दोनों मॉडल भावना शब्दकोश, निषेध, शब्द एम्बेडिंग और भावना प्रतीकों की विशेषताओं सहित सुविधाओं के एक सेट का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारी प्रणाली भावना विश्लेषण कार्य की सहायता करने के लिए इन सुविधाओं को जोड़ती है। ARB-SEN प्रणाली 0.720 का सहसंबंध स्कोर प्राप्त करती है, जो SemEval 2018 मूल्यांकन अभियान के भीतर आयोजित अरबी उप-कार्य के लिए वैलेंस तीव्रता प्रतिगमन (V-reg) में सभी प्रतिभागियों के बीच 6 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша предлагаемая арабская система анализа сентиментов под названием ARB-SEN. Эта система предназначена для Международного семинара по семантической оценке 2018 года (SemEval-2018), Задача 1: Влияние в твитах. ARB-SEN предлагает две контролируемые модели для оценки интенсивности настроений в арабских твитах. Обе модели используют набор функций, включая лексику настроений, отрицание, встраивание слов и символы эмоций. Наша система объединяет эти функции, чтобы помочь в выполнении задачи анализа настроений. Система ARB-SEN достигает показателя корреляции 0,720, занимая 6-е место среди всех участников регрессии интенсивности валентности (V-reg) для арабской подзадачи, организованной в рамках кампании по оценке SemEval 2018.', 'ga': 'Déanann an t-alt seo cur síos ar ár gcóras Anailís Mothúchán Araibis atá beartaithe darb ainm ARB-SEN. Tá an córas seo deartha don Cheardlann Idirnáisiúnta ar Mheastóireacht Shéimeantach 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. Molann ARB-SEN dhá mhúnla faoi mhaoirseacht chun déine na meon i dtvuíteanna Araibis a mheas. Úsáideann an dá mhúnla sraith gnéithe lena n-áirítear foclóir meon, diúltú, leabú focal agus gnéithe siombailí mothúcháin. Comhcheanglaíonn ár gcóras na gnéithe seo chun cabhrú leis an tasc anailíse meon. Baineann córas ARB-SEN amach scór comhghaoil de 0.720, ag rangú 6ú háit i measc na rannpháirtithe uile san aischéimniú déine valence (V-reg) don fho-thasc Araibis a eagraítear laistigh d’fheachtas meastóireachta SemEval 2018.', 'el': 'Αυτό το άρθρο περιγράφει το προτεινόμενο σύστημα ανάλυσης αραβικών συναισθημάτων με το όνομα Το σύστημα αυτό έχει σχεδιαστεί για το Διεθνές Εργαστήριο Σημαντικής Αξιολόγησης 2018 (Καθήκο1: Επίδραση στα Τουίτ). Η ARB-SEN προτείνει δύο εποπτευμένα μοντέλα για την εκτίμηση της έντασης συναισθημάτων στα αραβικά tweets. Και τα δύο μοντέλα χρησιμοποιούν ένα σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών όπως λεξικό συναισθημάτων, άρνηση, ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και χαρακτηριστικά συμβόλων συναισθημάτων. Το σύστημά μας συνδυάζει αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά για να βοηθήσει την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων. Το σύστημα επιτυγχάνει βαθμολογία συσχέτισης 0.720, με 6η θέση μεταξύ όλων των συμμετεχόντων στην παλινδρόμηση έντασης valence (V-reg) για την αραβική υποεργασία που οργανώνεται στο πλαίσιο της καμπάνιας αξιολόγησης SemEval 2018.', 'kk': 'Бұл мақала ARB-SEN деп аталатын араб синтиментті анализ жүйесімізді таңдайды. Бұл жүйе 2018 жылдың семантикалық оценкасының халықаралық жұмыс істеу үшін (semiEval-2018), 1- тапсырма: Tweets әсері. ARB-SEN араб tweets тізімдерінің сезімінің қанықтығын бағалау үшін екі басқару үлгісін ұсынады. Екі үлгілер сезімдік лексиканы, негативті, сөздерді ендіру және емоциялық символдарды қолданады. Жүйеміз осы мүмкіндіктерді сезімді анализ тапсырмасына көмектесу үшін біріктіреді. ARB-SEN жүйесі 0,720 деген кореляциялық нәтижесін жеткізеді, барлық қатысушылардың шешінші реттік қатысушылардың (V-reg) бағдарламасының Араб ішкі ішкі тапсырмасының шегінші реттік қатысушылардың (V-reg) бағ', 'hu': 'Ez a cikk az ARB-SEN néven javasolt arab érzelmek elemzésére irányuló rendszerünket ismerteti, amelyet a 2018. évi SemEval-2018 Nemzetközi Szemantikai Értékelési Műhely (Task1: Affect in Tweets) számára terveztek. Az ARB-SEN két felügyelt modellt javasol az arab tweetekben az érzelmek intenzitásának becslésére. Mindkét modell számos funkciót használ, beleértve az érzelmek lexikonját, a tagadást, a szóbeágyazást és az érzelmi szimbólumokat. Rendszerünk kombinálja ezeket a funkciókat, hogy segítse az érzelmek elemzését. Az ARB-SEN rendszer 0,720 korrelációs pontszámot ér el, a SemEval 2018-as értékelési kampány keretében szervezett arab alcsoport valamennyi résztvevője között 6. helyen áll.', 'ka': 'ამ პექტიკში ჩვენი აპაბიური სენტიმენტი ანალიზიციის სისტემა ARB-SEN. ეს სისტემა განსაზღვრებულია შამანტიკური განსაზღვრებაზე 2018 (SemEval-2018), რაოდენობა 1: შემდეგ Tweets-ში. ARB-SEN მუშაობს ორი მოდელი, რომელიც აპაბიური ტივიტებში სენტიმენტიური ინტენსტივის განსაზღვრებას. ორივე მოდელები გამოყენებენ სიმბოლოების ნაწილი, რომელიც სენტიმენტის ლექსიკონი, ნექციონი, სიმბოლოების შემოწყენება და ემოციონის სიმბო ჩვენი სისტემა ამ ფუნქციების შესაძლებლობად სენტიმენტის ანალიზიციის დახმარება. ARB-SEN სისტემა 0,720-ის კორელაციის მონაცემება, რომელიც ყველა გავალენსი ინტენსტიური რეგრესიის (V-reg) გავალენსი ინტენსტიური რეგრესიის (SemEval 2018-ის განსაზღვრებული) კომპანიაში ორგანიზებული აპაბიური ს', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje apibūdinama mūsų pasiūlyta Arabų jautrumo analizės sistema ARB-SEN. Ši sistema skirta Tarptautiniam seminarui dėl 2018 m. Semantinio vertinimo (Pusevalis-2018 m.), Task1: Poveikis Tweetuose. ARB-SEN siūlo du prižiūrimus jausmų intensyvumo arabų tweetuose vertinimo modelius. Abiejuose modeliuose naudojami tam tikri požymiai, įskaitant jausmų leksikono, neigiamo žodžio įterpimo ir emocinių simbolių požymius. Mūsų sistema derina šias savybes, kad padėtų atlikti jausmų analizę. ARB-SEN sistema pasiekia 0,720 koreliacijos tašką, 6-ąjį visų dalyvių, dalyvaujančių valencijos intensyvumo regresijoje (V-reg) arabų subužduotyje, organizuotame 2018 m. SemEval vertinimo kampanijoje.', 'ms': 'This article describes our proposed Arabic Sentiment Analysis system named ARB-SEN. This system is designed for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets.  ARB-SEN melamar dua model yang diawasi untuk menghargai intensiti perasaan dalam tweet Arab. Kedua-dua model menggunakan set ciri-ciri termasuk leksikon perasaan, negati, penyampaian perkataan dan ciri-ciri simbol emosi. Sistem kita menggabungkan ciri-ciri ini untuk membantu tugas analisis perasaan. Sistem ARB-SEN mencapai skor korelasi 0.720, peringkat ke-6 diantara semua peserta dalam regresi intensiti valensi (V-reg) untuk subtugas Arab yang diatur dalam kampanye penilaian SemEval 2018.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema di analisi dei sentimenti arabi proposto, ARB-SEN, progettato per il Workshop internazionale sulla valutazione semantica 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN propone due modelli supervisionati per stimare l'intensità del sentiment nei tweet arabi. Entrambi i modelli utilizzano una serie di funzionalità tra cui lessico sentimentale, negazione, incorporazione di parole e simboli emotivi. Il nostro sistema combina queste caratteristiche per assistere il compito di analisi del sentiment. Il sistema ARB-SEN raggiunge un punteggio di correlazione di 0,720, posizionandosi sesto tra tutti i partecipanti alla regressione dell'intensità di valenza (V-reg) per il sottotask arabo organizzato nell'ambito della campagna di valutazione SemEval 2018.", 'mk': 'Оваа статија го опишува нашиот предложен арапски систем на анализа на чувствата наречен АРБ-СЕН. Овој систем е дизајниран за Меѓународниот работилник за семантичка евалуација 2018 (SemEval-2018), задача1: Влијание на Твитовите. АРБ-СЕН предлага два надгледувани модели за проценка на интензитетот на чувствата на арапските твитови. Двајцата модели користат сет на карактеристики, вклучувајќи ги и сентименталните лексикони, негативностите, вградувањето на зборови и емоционалните симболи. Нашиот систем ги комбинира овие карактеристики за да помогне во задачата за анализа на чувствата. АРБ-СЕН системот постигна корелација од 0,720, рангирајќи се на 6-тото место меѓу сите учесници во регресијата на валентниот интензитет (V-reg) за арапската подзадача организирана во рамките на кампањата за проценка SemEval 2018.', 'ml': 'This article describes our proposed Arabic Sentiment Analysis system named ARB-SEN. This system is designed for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets.  ആര്\u200dബി- സെന്\u200d രണ്ട് മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. അറബി ടൂട്ടുകളിലെ വികാരത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വം കണക്കാക രണ്ടു മോഡലുകളും വികാരം ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d, നേജിഷന്\u200d, വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും വികാരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രത്യേകങ്ങളും ഉള്ള ഒരു  നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഈ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ വിശേഷവിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ ജോലിയെ സഹ ആര്\u200dബി-സെന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം 0. 720 ന്റെ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തുന്നു. സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d 2018 വിലുവിനുവില്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സകല പങ്കാളികളുടെയും കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള വിരോധ', 'no': 'Denne artikkelen beskriver vår foreslått arabiske sentimentanalysesystem med namn ARB-SEN. Dette systemet er utforma for den internasjonale arbeidsområdet på semantiske evaluering 2018 (semiEval-2018), oppgåve1: Etter tweet. ARB-SEN foreslår to oversikte modeller for å vurdere sentimenteringsintensiteten i arabiske tweeter. Begge modeller brukar eit sett av funksjonar, inkludert sentimentleksikon, negasjon, ord innebygging og emosjonssymbolefunksjonar. Sistemet vårt kombinerer desse funksjonane for å hjelpa sentimentanalyseoppgåva. ARB-SEN-systemet oppnår ein korrelasjonspoeng med 0,720, som rangerer 6. mellom alle deltakarane i regresjonen av valens intensitet (V-reg) for den arabiske underoppgåva organiserte i semiEval 2018-evalueringskampanjen.', 'mn': 'Энэ баримт бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн Араб хэмжээний шинжилгээний системийг ARB-SEN гэж нэрлэдэг. ARB-SEN Араб tweets дээр мэдрэмжтэй хүчтэй байдлыг тооцоолох хоёр удирдлагатай загварыг сануулдаг. Хоёр загвар нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн лексикон, эсрэг байдал, үг бий болгох болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тэмдэгтийг ашигладаг. Бидний систем сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээнд туслахын тулд эдгээр чадварыг нэгтгэдэг. ARB-SEN систем нь 0.720-тай холбоотой тоог олж, 2018 оны SemEval-ын дүгнэлт кампанид зохион байгуулагдсан Араб суб-даалгаварын холбоотой (V-reg) хүмүүсийн 6-р дүгнэлт гаргадаг.', 'mt': 'Dan l-artikolu jiddeskrivi s-sistema ta’ Analiżi tas-Sentimenti Għarab proposta tagħna msejħa ARB-SEN. Din is-sistema hija mfassla għall-Workshop Internazzjonali dwar l-Evalwazzjoni Semantika 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affett in Tweets. ARB-SEN tipproponi żewġ mudelli sorveljati biex tiġi stmata l-intensità tas-sentimenti fit-tweets Għarab. Iż-żewġ mudelli jużaw sett ta’ karatteristiċi li jinkludu l-lexicon tas-sentiment, in-negazzjoni, l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem u l-karatteristiċi tas-simboli emozzjonali. Is-sistema tagħna tgħaqqad dawn il-karatteristiċi biex tgħin fil-kompitu tal-analiżi tas-sentimenti. Is-sistema ARB-SEN tikseb punteġġ ta’ korrelazzjoni ta’ 0.720, li jikklassifika s-sitt fost il-parteċipanti kollha fir-rigressjoni tal-intensità tal-valenza (V-reg) għas-sottokompitu Għarbi organizzat fil-kampanja ta’ evalwazzjoni SemEval 2018.', 'pl': 'Ten artykuł opisuje nasz proponowany arabski system analizy sentymentów o nazwie ARB-SEN, przeznaczony dla Międzynarodowych Warsztatów Oceny Semantycznej 2018 (SemEval-2018), Zadanie 1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN proponuje dwa nadzorowane modele oszacowania intensywności sentymentów w arabskich tweetach. Oba modele używają zestawu funkcji, w tym leksykonu sentymentów, negacji, osadzania słów i symboli emocji. Nasz system łączy te funkcje, aby ułatwić analizę sentymentów. System ARB-SEN osiąga wynik korelacji 0,720, szósty ranking wśród wszystkich uczestników regresji walencji intensywności (V-reg) dla arabskiego podzadania organizowanego w ramach kampanii ewaluacyjnej SemEval 2018.', 'ro': 'Acest articol descrie sistemul nostru de analiză a sentimentelor arabe propus, ARB-SEN, conceput pentru Atelierul Internațional de Evaluare Semantică 2018 (SemEval-2018), Sarcina 1: Afectul în Tweets. ARB-SEN propune două modele supravegheate pentru a estima intensitatea sentimentului în tweeturile arabe. Ambele modele folosesc un set de caracteristici, inclusiv lexiconul sentimental, negația, încorporarea cuvintelor și caracteristicile simbolurilor emoționale. Sistemul nostru combină aceste caracteristici pentru a ajuta la sarcina de analiză a sentimentelor. Sistemul ARB-SEN obține un scor de corelație de 0.720, clasându-se pe locul 6 în rândul tuturor participanților la regresia intensității valenței (V-reg) pentru subsarcina arabă organizată în cadrul campaniei de evaluare SemEval 2018.', 'so': 'Warqaddan ayaa qoraya nidaamkan la soo jeeday Arab Sentiment Analysis system named ARB-SEN. This system is designed for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN wuxuu soo jeedaa laba model oo ilaaliya si ay u qiimeeyaan koronta daryeelka labada tweetka Carabiga. Labada model waxay isticmaalaan noocyo tiro ah, kuwaas oo ah fekerka leksiga, diidmada, hadalka ku qoran iyo calaamada hissiga. Systemkanu wuxuu isku daryeelaa tayooyinkaas si ay u caawiyaan shaqada kaleemeyska. Systemka ARB-SEN wuxuu gaadhaa koox xiriir ah oo 0.720, oo ka mid ah dadka ka qayb gala qoraalka koronta (V-reg) oo dhan (V-reg) ee u qabanqaabinaya sub-safka Carabiga ee ku jira campaign qiimeynta SemEval 2018.', 'sv': 'Den här artikeln beskriver vårt föreslagna arabiska känsloanalyssystem, ARB-SEN, som är utformat för den internationella workshopen om semantisk utvärdering 2018 (SemEval-2018), Uppgift 1: Påverkan i tweets. ARB-SEN föreslår två övervakade modeller för att uppskatta sentimentintensiteten i arabiska tweets. Båda modellerna använder en uppsättning funktioner inklusive sentiment lexikon, negation, ord inbäddning och känslosymboler funktioner. Vårt system kombinerar dessa funktioner för att underlätta sentimentalanalysen. ARB-SEN-systemet uppnår en korrelationspoäng på 0,720 och placerar sig 6:e bland alla deltagare i valensintensitetsregressionen (V-reg) för den arabiska underuppgiften som organiseras inom utvärderingskampanjen SemEval 2018.', 'ur': 'This article describes our proposed Arabic Sentiment Analysis system named ARB-SEN. This system is designed for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Effects in Tweets. ARB-SEN دو موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ عربی ٹویٹ میں احساس کی تنگی کا اندازہ کریں۔ دونوں نمڈلوں نے احساسات لکسیون، منفی، کلمات انڈینگ اور احساسات نمبروں کی شامل ایک سٹ کا استعمال کیا ہے. ہماری سیسٹم نے احساسات تحلیل کے کام کی مدد کرنے کے لئے یہ فرصت جمع کئے ہیں۔ ARB-SEN سیسٹم 0.720 کی تعلقات سکونٹ پہنچ رہا ہے، جو تمام مشرکین میں ششمین رقم رکھتا ہے جو نصم Eval 2018 کی ارزیابی کمپینٹ میں سازمان کیا گیا ہے عربی sub-task (V-reg) کے لئے ویلنس تیز ریگرس (V-reg) کے لئے۔', 'sr': 'Ovaj članak opisuje naš predloženi sistem analize sentimenta Arapskog jezika po imenu ARB-SEN. Ovaj sistem je dizajniran za Međunarodno radionico o semantičkoj evaluaciji 2018 (semiEval-2018), zadatak 1: utjecaj na Tweets. ARB-SEN predlaže dva nadgledana modela da proceni intenzitet sentimenta na arapskim tweetima. Obje modele koriste setu karakteristika uključujući leksikon sentiment a, negaciju, karakteristike za ugrađenje riječi i emocije. Naš sistem kombinira te karakteristike da pomogne zadatku analize sentimenta. ARB-SEN sistem postiže korelacijski rezultat od 0,720, koji je 6. red među svim sudionicima u reakciji valencijske intenzitete regresije (V-reg) za podzadatak Arapske organizovanu u okviru kampanje za procjenu pola Evala 2018.', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනය අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත අරාබික සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණ පද්ධතිය ARB-SEN කියලා තියෙනවා. ARB-SEN ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා අරාබි ට්විට් වලින් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වැඩක් දෙකක් අනුමාන කරන්න. මොඩල් දෙන්නම් භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක්, ප්\u200dරතිකාරය, වච අපේ පද්ධතිය මේ විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණ විශේෂණ වැඩ කරන්න. ARB-SEN පද්ධතියට 0.720 ක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් ලැබෙනවා, සම්බන්ධතාවක් 2018 සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බ', 'ta': 'இந்த கட்டுரை ARB- SEN என்ற பெயரிடப்பட்ட அரபி உணர்வு ஆய்வு அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. இந்த அமைப்பு செமாண்டிக் evaluation 2018 (SemEval- 2018), பணி1: Tweets விளைவு ARB- SEN இரண்டு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை அரபி தொடர்புகளில் உணர்வு உயரத்தை மதிப்பதற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறது. இவ்விரு மாதிரிகளும் உணர்வு லெக்சியன், எதிர்மறை, வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுதல் மற்றும் உணர்வு குறியீடுகள் கூடிய சில குணங்களை  Our system combines these features to assist the sentiment analysis task.  ARB-SEN அமைப்பு 0. 720 தொடர்பு மதிப்பு பெறுகிறது, செம்வால் 2018ன் மதிப்புக்குறிப்புக்குறிப்புக்குள் அமைப்புக்குள் அமைக்கப்பட்ட பங்கீட்டு விருப்பத்தில் 6', 'uz': "This article describes our proposed Arabic Sentiment Analysis system named ARB-SEN. This system is designed for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets.  ARB-SEN ikkita taʼminlovchi modellarni Arab Twitterdan hisoblash uchun imkoniyatlarni qiymatga ega qiladi. Bu ikkita modellar foydalanadi: sentiment lexicon, negativ, so'zlar qoʻyish va hissiyotning xususiyatlari imkoniyatlaridan foydalanadi. Bizning tizimmiz hissiyotni analyzer vazifasini qoʻllash uchun bu xususiyatlarni birlashtiradi. ARB-SEN tizimi SemEval 2018ning qiymati campaigning davomida organized arab tub vazifasi (V-reg) bo'lgan hamma qiymatni o'zgartirish (V-reg) bilan bog'liq qiymatga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống phân tích cảm xúc Ả Rập đề nghị có tên ARB-Sen. Hệ thống này được thiết kế cho Tiệm làm việc quốc tế về giá trị Semal-thẩm 8, Task1: nhạy trong Tweet. ARB-sen đề xuất hai mẫu được giám sát để ước lượng tình cảm trong các tweet tiếng Ả Rập. Cả hai mẫu đều dùng một bộ tính năng bao gồm ngôn ngữ cảm xúc, âm bản, từ ngữ và các biểu tượng cảm xúc. Hệ thống của chúng tôi kết hợp các tính năng này để hỗ trợ phân tích cảm xúc. Hệ thống ARB-Sen đạt được một điểm tương quan của 0.720, đang xếp hạng thứ sáu giữa tất cả những người tham gia vào sự phục hồi độ lượng tử (V-reg) cho nhiệm vụ phụ Ả Rập được tổ chức trong chiến dịch đánh giá Seml Ev8.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores foreslåede arabiske følelsesanalysesystem med navn ARB-SEN, som er designet til den internationale workshop om semantisk evaluering 2018 (SemEval-2018), Opgave 1: Påvirkning i tweets. ARB-SEN foreslår to overvågede modeller til at estimere sentimentintensiteten i arabiske tweets. Begge modeller bruger et sæt funktioner, herunder sentiment leksikon, negation, ordindlejring og følelsessymboler funktioner. Vores system kombinerer disse funktioner for at hjælpe sentimentalanalyseopgaven. ARB-SEN-systemet opnår en korrelationsscore på 0,720 og rangerer 6. blandt alle deltagere i valensintensitetsregressionen (V-reg) for den arabiske underopgave organiseret i SemEval 2018 evalueringskampagnen.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft ons voorgestelde Arabische Sentiment Analysis systeem genaamd ARB-SEN, ontworpen voor de Internationale Workshop Semantische Evaluatie 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN stelt twee begeleide modellen voor om de sentimentintensiteit in Arabische tweets te schatten. Beide modellen gebruiken een reeks functies, waaronder sentimentlexicon, ontkenning, woord insluiten en emotiesymbolen functies. Ons systeem combineert deze functies om de sentimentanalyse taak te ondersteunen. Het ARB-SEN systeem behaalt een correlatiescore van 0.720, die 6e rangschikt onder alle deelnemers aan de valentie intensiteit regressie (V-reg) voor de Arabische subtaak georganiseerd binnen de SemEval 2018 evaluatiecampagne.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата предложена арабска система за анализ на сентимента, наречена Тази система е предназначена за Международния семинар по семантична оценка 2018 (Задача 1: Въздействие в туитове). АРБ-СЕН предлага два контролирани модела за оценка на интензивността на сентимента в арабски туитове. И двата модела използват набор от функции, включително сентиментален лексикон, отрицание, вграждане на думи и функции за емоционални символи. Нашата система комбинира тези функции, за да подпомогне задачата за анализ на сентимента. Системата АРБ-СЕН постига корелационен резултат от 0.720, класирайки се на 6-о място сред всички участници в регресията на интензивността на валентността (В-рег) за арабската подзадача, организирана в рамките на кампанията за оценка.', 'de': 'Dieser Artikel beschreibt unser vorgeschlagenes arabisches Sentiment Analysis System namens ARB-SEN. Dieses System wurde für den Internationalen Workshop zur semantischen Evaluation 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets entwickelt. ARB-SEN schlägt zwei überwachte Modelle zur Abschätzung der Stimmungsintensität in arabischen Tweets vor. Beide Modelle verwenden eine Reihe von Funktionen, einschließlich Sentiment Lexikon, Negation, Wort Einbettung und Emotion Symbole Features. Unser System kombiniert diese Funktionen, um die Stimmungsanalyse zu unterstützen. Das ARB-SEN-System erreicht einen Korrelationswert von 0,720 und rangiert auf dem sechsten Platz unter allen Teilnehmern der Valenzintensitätsregression (V-reg) für die arabische Teilaufgabe, die im Rahmen der SemEval 2018 Evaluationskampagne organisiert wird.', 'hr': 'Ovaj članak opisuje naš predloženi arapski sistem za analizu sentimenta po imenu ARB-SEN. Ovaj sistem je dizajniran za Međunarodno radionice o semantičkoj procjeni 2018 (semiEval-2018), zadatak 1: utjecaj na Tweets. ARB-SEN predlaže dva nadzirana modela za procjenu intenzitete osjećaja na arapskim tweetima. Obje modele koriste skup karakteristika uključujući leksikon sentiment a, negaciju, karakteristike uključujući riječi i emocije. Naš sustav kombinira te karakteristike kako bi pomogla zadatku analize osjećaja. ARB-SEN sustav postiže korelacijski rezultat od 0,720, čineći se 6. mjesto među svim sudionicima u regresiji valencijalne intenzitete (V-reg) za podzadatak Arapske organiziranu u okviru kampanje za procjenu polovine ocjene 2018. godine.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 제시한 ARB-sen이라는 아랍어 정서 분석 시스템을 소개한다. 이 시스템은 2018년 의미평가 국제세미나(SemEval-2018) 임무 1: 추문의 감정을 위해 설계된 것이다.ARB-SEN은 아랍어 트윗의 정서적 강도를 가늠하기 위한 두 개의 감시 모델을 제시했다.두 모델 모두 하나의 특징을 사용했는데 감정 어휘, 부정, 단어 삽입과 감정 기호 특징을 포함한다.우리의 시스템은 이러한 기능을 결합시켜 정서 분석 임무를 보조한다.ARB-SEN 시스템의 관련 점수는 0.720으로, SemEval 2018 평가 행사에서 조직된 아랍어 하위 임무의 가격 강도 회귀(V-reg) 참가자 전원에서 6위를 차지했다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaelezea mfumo wetu wa Uchambuzi wa Kiarabu unaoitwa ARB-SEN. Mfumo huu unaundwa kwa ajili ya Warsha ya Kimataifa ya Uchunguzi wa Kimataifa ya SemEval-2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Inaathirika kwenye twita. ARB-SEN anapendekeza mifano miwili inayofuatiliwa kudhani ongezeko la hisia katika twiti za Kiarabu. Viwili viwili vinatumia vipengele vya hisia ikiwa ni pamoja na hisia za lexico, chuki, maneno yanayoingia na alama za hisia. Mfumo wetu unaunganisha vipengele hivi ili kusaidia uchambuzi wa hisia. Mfumo wa ARB-SEN unapata kiwango cha mahusiano cha 0.720, ukiwa na kiwango cha 6 kati ya washiriki wote katika ukandamizaji wa kiwango cha umeme (V-reg) kwa ajili ya jukumu la Kiarabu lililoandaliwa ndani ya kampeni ya uchunguzi wa SemEval 2018.', 'id': 'Artikel ini menjelaskan sistem Analisi Sentimen Arab yang diusulkan kami bernama ARB-SEN. Sistem ini dirancang untuk Workshop Internasional Evaluasi Semantik 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN mengusulkan dua model yang diawasi untuk memperkirakan intensitas sentimen dalam tweet Arab. Kedua model menggunakan set ciri-ciri termasuk lexikon sentimen, negatif, penerbangan kata dan simbol emosi ciri-ciri. Sistem kita menggabungkan fitur-fitur ini untuk membantu tugas analisis sentimen. Sistem ARB-SEN mencapai skor korelasi 0,720, peringkat ke-6 diantara semua peserta dalam regresi intensitas valensi (V-reg) untuk sub-tugas Arab yang diatur dalam kampanye evaluasi SemEval 2018.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull përshkruan sistemin tonë të propozuar për analizën e ndjenjave arabe të quajtur ARB-SEN. Ky sistem është projektuar për Workshop Ndërkombëtar mbi vlerësimin Semantik 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN propozon dy modele të mbikqyrur për të vlerësuar intensitetin e ndjenjave në tweetet arabe. Both models use a set of features including sentiment lexicon, negation, word embedding and emotion symbols features.  Sistemi ynë kombinon këto elemente për të ndihmuar detyrën e analizës së ndjenjave. Sistemi ARB-SEN arrin një pikë korrelacioni prej 0.720, renditje e gjashtë midis të gjithë pjesëmarrësve në regresionin e intensitetit të valencës (V-reg) për nëndetyrën arabe të organizuar brenda fushatës së vlerësimit SemEval 2018.', 'am': 'ይህ ጽሑፍ አርቢ-SEN የሚባል የአርቢ ሰንተራዊ Analysis ስርዓታችንን ይዘረዝራል። ይህ ስርዓት በ.ኤ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ አርቢ-SEN በዐረብኛ ትዊተሮች ላይ የስሜት ጉዳይ እንዲቆጠር ሁለት ተሟጋቾች ምሳሌዎችን ይገልጻል፡፡ ሁለቱም ሞዴላዎች የስሜት ሊክሲን፣ እውቀት፣ ቃላት እና የስህተት ምልክቶች በኩል የሚጠቀሙትን የፊደል ምርጫዎች ይጠይቃሉ፡፡ ሲስተካከላችን የስሜት ትምህርት ትምህርት አድራጊውን ለመረዳት እነዚህን ምርጫዎች ያጋራሉ፡፡ አርቢ-SEN ስርዓት የ0.720 ግንኙነት ነጥብ አግኝቷል፤ በሴምEval 2018 ማስታወቂያ ዘመቻ ውስጥ ለዓረባዊ ደብዳቤ አድራጊዎች (V-reg) በተካፈሉት የአረብኛ ደብዳቤ አድራጊዎች ሁሉ መካከል 6 ምዕራፍ ይደረጋል፡፡', 'fa': 'این مقاله سیستم تحلیل سنتی عربی به نام ARB-SEN را توصیف می\u200cکند. این سیستم برای کارگاه بین المللی در ارزیابی سنتی ۲۰۱۸ (نیمه-۲۰۱۸) طراحی شده است. ARB-SEN دو مدل نظارت شده را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد تا افزایش احساسات را در tweets عربی ارزیابی ارزیابی کند. هر دو مدل از یک مجموعه از ویژه\u200cهایی استفاده می\u200cکند که شامل لکسیون احساسات، منفی، ویژه\u200cهای ابزار کردن کلمات و احساسات است. سیستم ما این ویژگی ها را برای کمک به کار تحلیل احساسات ترکیب می کند. سیستم ARB-SEN یک امتیاز ارتباطی از 0.720 رسیده است که در سطح ششمین از تمام مشتریان در بازگشت شدت ارتباطی (V-reg) برای زیر کار عربی که در کمپین ارتباطی نیم Eval 2018 سازمان شده است.', 'tr': 'Bu makala arapça Sentiment Analyz sistemimizi ARB-SEN diýip atlandyrylýar. Bu sistemi Halkara Çalışma (Internal Workshop on Semantic Evaluation 2018) bilen tassyklandyrylýar (SemEval-2018), Taýgy 1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN arabça tweetlerde duýgyny takmynmak üçin iki gözlemli nusga teklip edýär. Her iki modeller duygusal leksikon, negasyon, sözleri girmek ve duygusal semboller içerisinde bir takım özellikleri kullanır. Biziň sistemamyz duýgular analýusiýasynyň işine kömek etmek üçin bu özellikleri birleşýär. ARB-SEN sistemasy 0.720 sany çykýardy, hemme tarapyndan 6-nji derejä çykýar', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր առաջարկված արաբական զգացմունքների վերլուծության համակարգը, որը կոչվում է ARB-SEN։ Այս համակարգը նախագծված է 2018 թվականի սեմատիկ գնահատման միջազգային աշխատասենյակի համար։ 1 ARB-SEN-ը առաջարկում է երկու վերահսկված մոդել արաբական թվիթերի զգացմունքների ինտենսիվությունը գնահատելու համար: Երկու մոդելները օգտագործում են մի շարք առանձնահատկություններ, ներառյալ զգացմունքների լեքսիկոն, մերժումը, բառերի ներառումը և զգացմունքների սիմվոլները: Մեր համակարգը համադրում է այս հատկությունները, որպեսզի օգնի զգացմունքների վերլուծության խնդիրը: ARB-SEN համակարգը հասնում է 0.720 հաղորդակցման գնահատականի, որը 6-րդ դասակարգվում է բոլոր մասնակիցների մոտ վալենսի ինտենսիվության ռեգրեսիայի (V-Reգ) մեջ արաբական ենթախնդրի համար, որը կազմակերպված է 2018 թվականի կիսագնահատականի քարոզարշա', 'af': "Hierdie artikel beskrywe ons voorgestelde Arabiese Sentiment Analysis stelsel genaamd ARB-SEN. Hierdie stelsel is ontwerp vir die Internasionale Werkshop op Semantiese Evaluering 2018 (SemEval-2018), Taak1: Affect in Tweets. Arb-SEN voorstel twee ondersoekte modele om die sentiment intensiteit in Arabiese tweets te vurdering. Beide modele gebruik 'n stel van funksies insluitend sentiment lexikon, negasie, woord inbêring en emosie simbole funksies. Ons stelsel kombinieer hierdie funksies om die sentimentanaliseerde taak te help. Arb-SEN stelsel bereik 'n korrelasie telling van 0.720, rangering 6de onder alle deelnimmers in die valensieintensiteit regresie (V-reg) vir die Arabiese sub-taak wat in die SemEval 2018 evalueringskampanie georganiseer is.", 'az': 'Bu m…ôktub bizim t…ôblińü edilmiŇü …ôr…ôb Sentiment Analizi sistemimizi ARB-SEN adlńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôyir. Bu sistem 2018-ci Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018), Task1: Tweets i√ßind…ô m√ľxt…ôlif t…ôsdiql…ônir. ARB-SEN …ôr…ôbc…ô tweetl…ôrd…ô hissl…ôrin ańüńĪrlńĪńüńĪnńĪ t…ômin etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn iki n…ôzar…ôtli modeli t…ôklif edir. ńįki modell…ôr sentiment leksikonu, negasyonu, s√∂zl…ôri daxil etm…ôk v…ô duygusal semboll…ôrini dahil olmaqla birlikd…ô f…ôrqli t…ôrzl…ôrini istifad…ô edirl…ôr. Sistemimiz bu x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôri hiss analizi iŇüin…ô k√∂m…ôk etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn birl…ôŇüdirir. ARB-SEN sistemi 0,720 il…ô bańülantńĪlńĪ n√∂qt…ôsin…ô yetirir, T√ľm s…ôviyy…ôd…ô 2018-ci SemEval deńüerlendirm…ôsi kampanyasńĪndan m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilmiŇü …ôr…ôb apa-g√∂revi (V-reg) m√ľqabiliyy…ôtind…ô istifad…ô ed…ônl…ôr arasńĪnda 6-ci d…ôr…ôc…ô verir.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটি আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত আরবী সেনিটেমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ ব্যবস্থার ব্যাখ্যা করছে যার নাম আর্বি-সেন। এই ব্যবস্থা সেম্যান্টিক ইনভায়েশন ২০১৮ (সেমভাল-২০১ আরবি-সেন দুই পর্যবেক্ষক মডেলের প্রস্তাব করেছেন আরবি টুইটে আবেগের শক্তি হিসেবে দেখার জন্য। উভয় মডেল ব্যবহার করে অনুভূতি লেক্সিকোন, নেতিবেশন, শব্দ প্রবেশ করা এবং আবেগের প্রতীক বৈশিষ্ট্য। আমাদের সিস্টেম এই বৈশিষ্ট্য বিশ্লেষণ কাজে সাহায্য করার জন্য একত্রিত করে। আরবি-সেন ব্যবস্থা সেমইভাল ২০১৮ সালের মুল্যায়ন প্রচারণার মধ্যে আয়োজন করা আরবি সাব কাজের জন্য একটি সংশ্লিষ্ট স্কোর অর্জন করে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj članak opisuje naš predloženi sistem analize sentimenta arapskog jezika po imenu ARB-SEN. Ovaj sistem je dizajniran za Međunarodno radionico o semantičkoj evaluaciji 2018 (semiEval-2018), zadatak 1: utjecaj na Tweets. ARB-SEN predlaže dva nadgledana modela da procjenjuje intenzitet osjećaja na arapskim tweetima. Obje modele koriste setu karakteristika uključujući leksikon sentiment a, negaciju, karakteristike ugrađenih riječi i emocija. Naš sistem kombinira te karakteristike da pomogne zadatku analize sentimenta. Sistem ARB-SEN postiže korelacijski rezultat od 0,720, u kojem se rankira 6. među svim sudionicima u regresiji valencijske intenzitete (V-reg) za podzadatak Arapskog organizovanog u okviru kampanje za procjenu polovine Evala 2018.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema d'anàlisi de sentiments àrab proposat anomenat ARB-SEN. Aquest sistema està dissenyat per a l'Atelier Internacional sobre Evaluació Semàtica 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN proposa dos models supervisats per estimar la intensitat de sentiments dels tweets àrabs. Ambdós models utilitzen un conjunt de característiques, incloent el lexicó del sentiment, la negatió, l'incorporació de paraules i els símbols emocionals. El nostre sistema combina aquestes característiques per ajudar a la tasca d'anàlisi del sentiment. El sistema ARB-SEN aconsegueix una puntuació de correlació de 0,720, la sexta entre tots els participants en la regressió de la intensitat de valencia (V-reg) per la subtasca àrab organitzada en la campanya d'evaluació SemEval 2018.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš navržený systém analýzy arabských sentimentů s názvem ARB-SEN, který je navržen pro Mezinárodní workshop o sémantickém hodnocení 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN navrhuje dva monitorované modely pro odhad intenzity sentimentu v arabských tweetech. Oba modely používají sadu funkcí včetně slovníku sentimentu, negace, vložení slov a emočních symbolů. Náš systém kombinuje tyto funkce, aby pomohl při analýze sentimentů. Systém ARB-SEN dosahuje korelačního skóre 0,720 a umístí se na šestém místě mezi všemi účastníky regrese valenční intenzity (V-reg) pro arabský subúkol organizovaný v rámci hodnotící kampaně SemEval 2018.', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa kuvataan arabiankielistﾃ､ tunneanalyysijﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､ nimeltﾃ､ ARB-SEN, joka on suunniteltu Semanttista arviointia kﾃ､sittelevﾃ､ﾃ､n kansainvﾃ､liseen seminaariin 2018 (SemEval-2018), tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n 1: Vaikutus tweeteissﾃ､. ARB-SEN ehdottaa kahta valvottua mallia arabialaisten twiittien tunteiden intensiteetin arvioimiseksi. Molemmat mallit kﾃ､yttﾃ､vﾃ､t joukon ominaisuuksia, kuten tunteiden sanastoa, kieltﾃ､mistﾃ､, sanan upottamista ja tunteiden symboleja. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme yhdistﾃ､ﾃ､ nﾃ､mﾃ､ ominaisuudet helpottamaan tunteiden analysointia. ARB-SEN-jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ saavuttaa korrelaatiopisteen 0,720 ja sijoittuu kuudenneksi kaikkien SemEval 2018 -arviointikampanjassa jﾃ､rjestetyn arabian alatehtﾃ､vﾃ､n valenssiintensiteettiregression (V-reg) osallistujien joukossa.', 'et': 'Selles artiklis kirjeldatakse meie kavandatud araabia tunnete analüüsi süsteemi nimega ARB-SEN, mis on mõeldud 2018. aasta semantilise hindamise rahvusvaheliseks seminariks (SemEval-2018), ülesandeks 1: mõju tweetides. ARB-SEN pakub välja kaks järelevalvemudelit, et hinnata tundete intensiivsust araabia säutsudes. Mõlemad mudelid kasutavad erinevaid funktsioone, sealhulgas sentimentaalse leksikoni, eitamise, sõna manustamise ja emotsioonisümbolite funktsioone. Meie süsteem ühendab need funktsioonid, et aidata kaasa tunde analüüsi ülesandele. ARB-SEN süsteem saavutab korrelatsiooniskoori 0,720, mis on kõigi SemEval 2018 hindamiskampaania raames korraldatud araabia alamülesande valentsuse intensiivsuse regressioonis osalejate seas 6. kohal.', 'jv': 'This section description us proposal Hebrew Sentiment Test System name ARB ARB-SEN ngerti macala apat kuwi model sing bisa perusahaan mruput kanggo kuwi tiket arap iki. Laptop" and "Desktop Sistem awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo hal-hal kanggo ngerasakno dadi pancening winih dhéwé. ARB', 'ha': "Wannan makala yana bayyana na fassarar da aka buƙata masu fassarar Larabci Analyze system called ArB-SeN. This system is designed for the International workspace on Semantic evaluation 2018 (SemEl-2018), Task1: Affect in Twitter. ARB-SEN proposes two supervised models to estimate the sentiment intensity in Arabic tweets.  Dukkan ayuka biyu sunã amfani da tsarin wasu shiryoyi, kamar misalin leksikon, motsi, kalmar da ke cikin shirin ayuka da za'a yi amfani da. Systeminmu yana koma da waɗannan tayari dõmin su taimake aikin analyza. Ma'anar ABS-SAN yana sãmun wata muhalli na 0.1970, mai ranar 6 daga duk mãsu shirin da ke cikin ma'aunin mataimaki (V-reg) wa sub-aikin Larabci wanda aka organiza a cikin campcampin da aka ƙayyade Semeval 2018.", 'sk': 'Ta članek opisuje naš predlagani arabski sistem analize čustev z imenom ARB-SEN, ki je zasnovan za mednarodno delavnico o semantični evalvaciji 2018 (SemEval-2018), Naloga 1: Vpliv v tweetih. ARB-SEN predlaga dva nadzorovana modela za oceno intenzivnosti sentimenta v arabskih tweetih. Oba modela uporabljata nabor funkcij, vključno z leksikonom sentimenta, zanikanjem, vključevanjem besed in funkcijami simbolov čustev. Naš sistem združuje te funkcije za pomoč pri nalogi analize sentimenta. Sistem ARB-SEN doseže korelacijsko oceno 0,720 in se uvršča na 6. mesto med vsemi udeleženci regresije intenzivnosti valence (V-reg) za arabsko podnalogo, organizirano v okviru akcije vrednotenja SemEval 2018.', 'he': 'המאמר הזה מתאר את מערכת ניתוח הרגשות הערבית המוצעת שלנו בשם ARB-SEN. המערכת הזאת מתוכננת עבור הספק הבינלאומי על הערכה סמנטית 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN מציע שני דוגמנים מפקחים כדי להעריך את האינטנסיביות הרגשות בטוויטים ערביים. שני הדוגמנים משתמשים בסט של תכונות כולל לקסיקון רגשות, שליטה, תכניס מילים וסמלים רגשות. המערכת שלנו משלבת את האופיינים האלה כדי לסייע למשימת ניתוח הרגשות. מערכת ARB-SEN משיגה נקודת תקשורת של 0.720, המצב השישי בין כל השתתפים בחזרת האינטנסיביות האינטנסיביות (V-reg) למשימה הערבית המאורגנת בתוך קמפיין הערכה SemEval 2018.', 'bo': 'This article describes our proposed Arabic Sentiment Analysis system named ARB-SEN. This system is designed for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation 2018 (SemEval-2018), Task1: Affect in Tweets. ARB-SEN ལྟ་བུའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འདོད་པ་དེ་ཨར་བིའི་tweets་ནང་གི་ཐད་ཚོར་དཔག་ཡོད། སྣང་ཚུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྐད་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྤྱོད་པ། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་རྟགས་འདི་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་རོགས་སྤྱོད་རོགས་མཉམ་བས ARB-SEN མ་ལག་གིས་0.720 ཡི་correlation score་དང་། ranking 6th among all participants in the valence intensity regression (V-reg) for the Arabic sub-task organized within the SemEval 2018 evaluation campaign.'}
{'en': 'psyML at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'ar': 'psyML في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: نقل التعلم لتحليل المشاعر والعاطفة', 'fr': "PsyML à SemEval-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Apprentissage par transfert pour l'analyse des sentiments et des émotions", 'es': 'PsyML en SemeVal-2018 Tarea 1: Transferir el aprendizaje para el análisis de sentimientos y emociones', 'pt': 'psyML na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Transferência de Aprendizagem para Análise de Sentimentos e Emoções', 'ja': 'semEval -2018のpsyMLタスク1 ：感情と感情分析のための転移学習', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务1者psyML:情析者迁学', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर psyML: भावना और भावना विश्लेषण के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखना', 'ru': 'psyML на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Передача обучения для анализа чувств и эмоций', 'ga': 'psyML ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Foghlaim a Aistriú le hAghaidh Mothúchán agus Anailís', 'ka': 'psyML SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 1: სტრანსტრების სწავლება Sentiment და Emotion Analysis', 'hu': 'PsyML a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Transzfertanulás érzelmi és érzelmi elemzéshez', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Μάθηση μεταφοράς για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και συναισθημάτων', 'mk': 'psyML at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'lt': 'psyML per 2018 m. pusmetį 1 užduotis: Perdavimo mokymasis jautrumo ir emocijos analizei', 'kk': 'psyML 1- тапсырма: Sentiment және көңіл талдау үшін оқыту', 'it': "psyML a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning per l'analisi dei sentimenti e delle emozioni", 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ പൈസിഎംഎല്\u200d: സെന്റിമെന്റിനും ഇമോട്ടിഷന്\u200d അന്യായം മാറ്റുന്നതിനും പഠിക്കുക', 'ms': 'psiML pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Pemindahan Belajar untuk Analisi Sentiment dan Emotion', 'mt': 'psyML f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Tagħlim ta’ Trasferiment għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment u l-Emożizzjoni', 'mn': 'psyML at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'no': 'psyML ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Overføringslæring for følgjande og følgjande analyser', 'pl': 'psyML w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Transfer Learning dla analizy sentymentów i emocji', 'ro': 'psyML la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Transfer de învățare pentru analiza sentimentelor și emoțiilor', 'sr': 'psyML na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Naučenje prijenosa za analizu sentimenta i emocija', 'si': 'PsyML at Halfeval-2018 Job 1: Transfer Training for Sentiment and Emotion විශාලනය', 'sv': 'psyML på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Överföring av lärande för känslo- och känsloanalys', 'so': 'psyML at SemEval-2018 Shaqooyinka 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் சைஎம்எல்: உணர்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சிக்கான மாற்று கற்றல்', 'ur': 'psyML سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس ۱ میں: Sentiment اور Emotion Analysis کے لئے ترنسفر سیکھنا', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifani 1: Sentiment va Emotion Analysis uchun Transfer Learning', 'vi': 'psyML at SemEvl-208 Task 1: truyền học về cảm xúc.', 'hr': 'psyML na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Naučenje prijenosa za analizu osjećaja i emocija', 'nl': 'psyML bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Transfer Learning voor Sentiment- en Emotieanalyse', 'da': 'psyML på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Overførsel af læring til følelses- og følelsesanalyse', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Трансферно обучение за анализ на чувствата и емоциите', 'de': 'psyML bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Transfer Learning für die Sentiment- und Emotionsanalyse', 'id': 'psiML di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'fa': 'psyML در تابع ۱ در نیم Eval-2018: تحویل یادگیری برای تحلیل احساسات و احساسات', 'ko': 'psyML이SemEval-18 퀘스트 1: 정서와 정서 분석의 이동 학습', 'sw': 'psyML kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 1: Ufunzi wa Uhamiaji kwa ajili ya Uchambuzi wa Wakati na Uchunguzi', 'tr': 'psyML at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'af': 'psyML by SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Oordrag leer vir Sentiment en Emotie Analyseer', 'sq': 'psyML në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'am': 'ስራ 1: Transfer Learn for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'az': 'psyML at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১-এ মানসিক এমএল: সেন্টাইমেন্ট এবং ইমোটিয়ন বিশ্লেষণের জন্য পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা', 'ca': 'psiML a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'cs': 'psyML na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Transfer učení pro analýzu citů a emocí', 'et': 'PsyML SemEval-2018 ülesanne 1: siirdeõpe tunnete ja emotsioonide analüüsiks', 'fi': 'PsyML SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Siirtymäoppiminen tunteiden ja tunteiden analysointiin', 'bs': 'psyML na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Naučenje prijenosa za analizu osjećaja i emocija', 'sk': 'PsyML na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Prenos učenja za analizo čustev in čustev', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'PsML ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis', 'jv': 'pyML at semi-2008 task 1: transfer Learning for Sentiment and emutation', 'bo': 'psyML at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Transfer Learning for Sentiment and Emotion Analysis'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe the first attempt to perform transfer learning from sentiment to emotions. Our system employs Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) networks, including bidirectional LSTM (biLSTM) and LSTM with attention mechanism. We perform transfer learning by first pre-training the LSTM networks on sentiment data before concatenating the penultimate layers of these networks into a single vector as input to new dense layers. For the E-c subtask, we utilize a novel approach to train models for correlated emotion classes. Our system performs 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 on all English subtasks EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of SemEval 2018 Task 1 : Affect in Tweets.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف المحاولة الأولى لأداء التعلم المنقول من المشاعر إلى العواطف. يستخدم نظامنا شبكات ذاكرة طويلة المدى (LSTM) ، بما في ذلك LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه (biLSTM) و LSTM مع آلية الانتباه. نقوم بإجراء تعلم النقل عن طريق التدريب المسبق لشبكات LSTM على بيانات المشاعر قبل تسلسل الطبقات قبل الأخيرة من هذه الشبكات في متجه واحد كمدخل إلى طبقات كثيفة جديدة. بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية E-c ، نستخدم نهجًا جديدًا لتدريب النماذج لفصول العاطفة المرتبطة. ينفذ نظامنا 4/48 ، 3/39 ، 8/38 ، 4/37 ، 4/35 في جميع المهام الفرعية باللغة الإنجليزية EI-reg ، EI-oc ، V-reg ، V-oc ، E-c من SemEval 2018 المهمة 1: التأثير في التغريدات.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons la première tentative de transfert d'apprentissage des sentiments aux émotions. Notre système utilise des réseaux LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory), y compris LSTM bidirectionnels (BilsTM) et LSTM avec mécanisme d'attention. Nous effectuons un apprentissage par transfert en pré-entraînant les réseaux LSTM sur les données de sentiment avant de concaténer les avant-dernières couches de ces réseaux en un seul vecteur comme entrée dans de nouvelles couches denses. Pour la sous-tâche e-C, nous utilisons une nouvelle approche pour entraîner des modèles pour des classes d'émotions corrélées. Notre système effectue 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 sur toutes les sous-tâches en anglais EI-Reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, e-C de SemEval 2018 Task 1\xa0: Affect in Tweets.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos a primeira tentativa de realizar a transferência de aprendizado do sentimento para as emoções. Nosso sistema emprega redes de Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM), incluindo LSTM bidirecional (biLSTM) e LSTM com mecanismo de atenção. Realizamos o aprendizado de transferência primeiro pré-treinando as redes LSTM em dados de sentimento antes de concatenar as penúltimas camadas dessas redes em um único vetor como entrada para novas camadas densas. Para a subtarefa E-c, utilizamos uma nova abordagem para treinar modelos para classes de emoções correlacionadas. Nosso sistema executa 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 em todas as subtarefas de inglês EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c de SemEval 2018 Tarefa 1: Afete em Tweets.', 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos el primer intento de transferir el aprendizaje del sentimiento a las emociones. Nuestro sistema emplea redes de memoria a corto plazo (LSTM), que incluyen LSTM bidireccional (BilSTM) y LSTM con mecanismo de atención. Llevamos a cabo el aprendizaje de transferencia al entrenar previamente las redes LSTM en datos de opinión antes de concatenar las penúltimas capas de estas redes en un solo vector como entrada a nuevas capas densas. Para la subtarea e-C, utilizamos un enfoque novedoso para entrenar modelos para clases de emociones correlacionadas. Nuestro sistema realiza 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 en todas las subtareas en inglés Ei-reg, Ei-OC, V-reg, V-oc, e-C de SemEval 2018 Tarea 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'ja': '本稿では、感情から感情への転移学習を行う最初の試みについて述べる。当社のシステムは、双方向LSTM （ biLSTM ）と注意機構を備えたLSTMを含むLong Short - Term Memory （ LSTM ）ネットワークを採用しています。転送学習は、まずセンチメントデータ上のLSTMネットワークを事前にトレーニングしてから、これらのネットワークのペナンティメイトレイヤーを単一のベクトルに連結し、新しい高密度レイヤーへの入力として実行します。E - Cサブタスクでは、相関感情クラスのモデルをトレーニングするための新規アプローチを利用します。私たちのシステムは、SemEval 2018タスク1のすべての英語サブタスクEI - reg、EI - oc、V - reg、V - oc、E - cで4/48、3/39、8/38、4/37、4/35を実行します：ツイートに影響を与えます。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम भावनाओं से भावनाओं तक स्थानांतरण सीखने के पहले प्रयास का वर्णन करते हैं। हमारा सिस्टम दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक मेमोरी (एलएसटीएम) नेटवर्क को नियोजित करता है, जिसमें ध्यान तंत्र के साथ द्विदिश एलएसटीएम (biLSTM) और एलएसटीएम शामिल हैं। हम नई घनी परतों के इनपुट के रूप में इन नेटवर्कों की अंतिम परतों को एक ही वेक्टर में संयोजित करने से पहले भावना डेटा पर LSTM नेटवर्क को पहले पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण देकर स्थानांतरण सीखने का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। ई-सी सबटास्क के लिए, हम सहसंबद्ध भावना वर्गों के लिए मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारा सिस्टम सभी अंग्रेजी उप-कार्यों EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of SemEval 2018 कार्य 1: Tweets में प्रभाव पर 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'zh': '本文中,我们描述了从情到情情转学的初试。 吾统用长短期记(LSTM)网络,双向LSTM(biLSTM)有注意之LSTM。 先于情数LSTM网络预训练以行之,然后连网络之倒数为向量新密集层之输。 E-c子之事,以新练情。 臣等统于SemEval 2018务1:推文之英语子EI-reg,EI-oc,V-reg,V-oc,E-c行4/48,3/39,8/38,4/37,4/35。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем первую попытку перенести обучение из чувства в эмоции. Наша система использует сети длинной краткосрочной памяти (LSTM), включая двунаправленные LSTM (biLSTM) и LSTM с механизмом внимания. Мы выполняем обучение передаче, предварительно обучая сети LSTM на данных настроений, прежде чем объединять предпоследние слои этих сетей в один вектор в качестве входных данных для новых плотных слоев. Для подзадачи E-c мы используем новый подход к обучению моделей для коррелированных классов эмоций. Наша система выполняет 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 по всем английским подзадачам EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c задачи 1 SemEval 2018: Влияние в твитах.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar an gcéad iarracht chun foghlaim aistrithe a dhéanamh ó mheon go mothúcháin. Fostaíonn ár gcóras líonraí Cuimhne Fada Gearrthéarmach (LSTM), lena n-áirítear LSTM déthreo (biLSTM) agus LSTM le meicníocht aird. Déanaimid foghlaim aistrithe trí na líonraí LSTM a réamhoiliúint ar shonraí meon an chéad uair sula ndéantar sraitheanna leathdhéanach na ngréasán seo a chomhchaitheamh in aon veicteoir amháin mar ionchur do shraitheanna dlútha nua. Maidir leis an bhfothasc E-c, bainimid úsáid as cur chuige nua chun samhlacha a thraenáil le haghaidh ranganna mothúcháin chomhghaolmhara. Feidhmíonn ár gcóras 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 ar gach fothasc Béarla EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c de SemEval 2018 Tasc 1: Tionchar aige in Tweets.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ აღწერეთ პირველი მოცდილობა გავაკეთოთ სწავლებას სენტიმენტიდან ემოციონებისთვის. ჩვენი სისტემა ძალიან კროტრამეტრის მეხსიერება (LSTM) ქსელების გამოყენება, რომლებიც ბიდირექციონალური LSTM (biLSTM) და LSTM მოხსიერებული მექანსი. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ პირველი პირველი წინ განვიცემებით LSTM ქსელების სენტიმენტის მონაცემებზე, რომელიც ამ ქსელების პირველი სინაცემები ერთი გვეკტორიში გადატანა, როგორც ახალი სინაცე E-C სტკითხვისთვის, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ პრომენტის მიღება მოდელების შემწავლობად კორელექტური ემოციონის კლასებისთვის. ჩვენი სისტემა გავაკეთება 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 ყველა ინგლისური საშუალებაზე EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of SemEval 2018 Task 1: Effects in Tweets.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, περιγράφουμε την πρώτη προσπάθεια να πραγματοποιηθεί η μάθηση μεταφοράς από το συναίσθημα στα συναισθήματα. Το σύστημά μας χρησιμοποιεί δίκτυα Μακράς Βραχυπρόθεσμης Μνήμης (συμπεριλαμβανομένων αμφίδρομης Μνήμης) και με μηχανισμό προσοχής. Πραγματοποιούμε τη μάθηση μεταφοράς με την πρώτη προεκπαίδευση των δικτύων σε δεδομένα συναισθημάτων πριν συνδέσετε τα vorletztα στρώματα αυτών των δικτύων σε ένα ενιαίο διάνυσμα ως εισαγωγή σε νέα πυκνά στρώματα. Για την υποταγή Ε-γ, χρησιμοποιούμε μια νέα προσέγγιση για την εκπαίδευση μοντέλων για συσχετιζόμενες κατηγορίες συναισθημάτων. Το σύστημά μας εκτελεί 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 σε όλες τις αγγλικές δευτερεύουσες εργασίες εργασίας 1: Επίδραση στα tweets.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az első kísérletet az érzelmekről az érzelmekre való átadásra. Rendszerünk hosszú rövid távú memória (LSTM) hálózatokat alkalmaz, beleértve a kétirányú LSTM (biLSTM) és az LSTM figyelemmechanizmust. Transzfer tanulást végezünk az LSTM hálózatok érzelmi adatokra való előképzésével, mielőtt a hálózatok utolsó rétegeit egyetlen vektorba összekapcsoljuk, mint bemenet új sűrű rétegekbe. Az E-c részfeladat esetében új megközelítést alkalmazunk a korrelált érzelmi osztályokra vonatkozó modellek képzésére. Rendszerünk teljesíti a 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 angol alfeladatokat az EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c SemEval 2018 feladatának 1: Hatás tweetekben.', 'it': "In questo articolo, descriviamo il primo tentativo di eseguire l'apprendimento di trasferimento dal sentimento alle emozioni. Il nostro sistema utilizza reti LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory), tra cui LSTM bidirezionale (biLSTM) e LSTM con meccanismo di attenzione. Eseguiamo l'apprendimento di trasferimento pre-formazione delle reti LSTM sui dati sentiment prima di concatenare i penultimi strati di queste reti in un unico vettore come input a nuovi strati densi. Per la sottomissione E-c, utilizziamo un approccio innovativo per formare modelli per classi emotive correlate. Il nostro sistema esegue 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 su tutte le sottoattività inglesi EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c di SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда бірінші оқытуды сезімдерден емоцияларға ауыстыру әрекетін таңдаймыз. Біздің жүйеміз қысқа уақыт жады (LSTM) желілерін жұмыс істейді, бұл желілерді бірдей басқа LSTM (biLSTM) және LSTM механизмімен қолданылады. Біз LSTM желілерін бірінші алдын- ала оқыту үшін осы желілердің ең қабатты қабаттарды жаңа жиілік қабаттарына енгізу үшін бір векторға аударып жүредік. E-c суреті үшін, көмектесетін емоциялық класс үшін моделдерді оқыту үшін романдық тәсілді қолданамыз. Біздің жүйеміз 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35, барлық ағылшын тілінде EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of semiEval 2018 Task 1: Tweets әсері.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname pirmąjį bandymą atlikti mokymąsi iš jausmo į emocijas. Mūsų sistema naudoja ilgalaikio trumpalaikio prisiminimo (LSTM) tinklus, įskaitant dvikrypčius LSTM (biLSTM) ir LSTM su dėmesio mechanizmu. Mes atliekame perdavimo mokymą pirmą kartą parengdami LSTM tinklus dėl jautrumo duomenų, prieš sujungdami priešpaskutinius šių tinklų sluoksnius į vieną vektorių kaip įnašą į naujus tankius sluoksnius. E-c paklausai naudojame naują metodą mokymui modeliams koreliuojamoms emocijų klasėms. Mūsų sistema atlieka 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 visų anglų subtaskų EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, го опишуваме првиот обид за префрлање на учењето од чувство на емоции. Нашиот систем употребува мрежи на долгорочна меморија (ЛСТМ), вклучително и дворочна ЛСТМ (БиЛСТМ) и ЛСТМ со механизам на внимание. Ние извршуваме трансферентно учење со прва предобука на ЛСТМ мрежите за сентиментални податоци пред да ги концентрираме пенултиматните слоеви на овие мрежи во еден вектор како влог во нови густи слоеви. For the E-c subtask, we utilize a novel approach to train models for correlated emotion classes.  Our system performs 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 on all English subtasks EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan cubaan pertama untuk melakukan pemindahan belajar dari perasaan ke emosi. Sistem kami menggunakan rangkaian Memori Panjang-Term (LSTM), termasuk LSTM bidireksi (biLSTM) dan LSTM dengan mekanisme perhatian. Kami melakukan pembelajaran pemindahan dengan melatih awal rangkaian LSTM pada data sentimen sebelum menyatukan lapisan penultimate rangkaian ini ke dalam vektor tunggal sebagai input ke lapisan tebal baru. Untuk subtask E-c, kita menggunakan pendekatan baru untuk melatih model untuk kelas emosi berkorelated. Sistem kita melaksanakan 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 pada semua subtasks bahasa Inggeris EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, aħna niddeskrivu l-ewwel tentattiv biex isir it-tagħlim ta’ trasferiment mis-sentiment għall-emozzjonijiet. Is-sistema tagħna tuża netwerks ta’ Memorja fit-Tul ta’ Terminu Qasir (LSTM), inklużi l-LSTM bidirezzjonali (biLSTM) u l-LSTM b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni. We perform transfer learning by first pre-training the LSTM networks on sentiment data before concatenating the penultimate layers of these networks into a single vector as input to new dense layers.  Għas-sottomistoqsija E-c, a ħna nużaw approċċ ġdid biex inħarrġu mudelli għal klassijiet ta’ emozzjonijiet korrelati. Is-sistema tagħna twettaq 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 fuq is-sottomistoqsijiet kollha Ingliżi EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c ta’ SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affett in Tweets.', 'no': 'I denne papiren beskriver vi den første forsøka å utføra læring frå følelser til følelser. Sistemet vårt brukar langsiktig minne (LSTM), inkludert bidireksjonale LSTM (biLSTM) og LSTM med oppmerksmekanisme. Vi utfører læring med første føreøving av LSTM-nettverket på sentimentsdata før du sammenliknar dei heile lagene i disse nettverkene til ein enkel vektor som inndata til nye tette lag. For E-c-underspørjinga bruker vi ein novel tilnærming for å trene modeller for korrelaterte emosjonsklassar. Sistemet vårt utfører 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 på alle engelske subtaskar EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c av semiEval 2018 oppgåve 1: Effekt i Tweets.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വികാരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വികാരങ്ങളിലേക്ക് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ ശ്രമം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരിച്ചുതരുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ നീളം ചെറുതായ മെമ്മറി (LSTM) നെറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ബിഡിയര്\u200dട്ടിക്കല്\u200d LSTM (ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റിം) എന്നിവയും  നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യ പരിശീലനത്തിനു മുന്\u200dപ് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ലെസ്റ്റിം നെറ്റിന്റെ വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നതിന് മുമ് E-c സബ്ജിസിന് വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d നടപടി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, കൂടുതല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസിന് മോഡലു ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35, എല്ലാ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് സബ്ട്രിക്കുകളുടെയും കാര്യങ്ങളിലും എഐ-reg, EI-oc, V-reg', 'pl': 'W artykule opisujemy pierwszą próbę przeprowadzenia nauki transferowej od sentymentów do emocji. Nasz system wykorzystuje sieci Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM), w tym dwukierunkowe LSTM (biLSTM) i LSTM z mechanizmem uwagi. Przeprowadzamy naukę transferową poprzez pierwsze wstępne szkolenie sieci LSTM na danych sentymentów, zanim połączymy przedostatnie warstwy tych sieci w jeden wektor jako wejście do nowych gęstych warstw. W podzadaniu E-c wykorzystujemy nowatorskie podejście do treningu modeli dla skorelowanych klas emocji. Nasz system wykonuje 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 na wszystkich angielskich podzadaniach EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, E-c SemEval 2018 Zadanie 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдрэмжээс сэтгэл хөдлөлд суралцах анхны хичээл тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний систем хоёр богино хугацааны санамж (LSTM) сүлжээг ашигладаг. Энэ нь хоёр дахин ажиллах LSTM (biLSTM) болон LSTM-г анхаарлын механизмтай ашигладаг. Бид анхны өмнө сургалтыг LSTM сүлжээнд мэдрэмж өгөгдлийн талаар шинэ жингийн давхар руу нэг вектор руу шилжүүлэхээс өмнө нь мэдрэмж өгөгдлийн талаар шилжүүлэх сургалтыг хийдэг. Э-с суурь асуултын тулд бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хичээл дээр холбоотой загваруудыг суралцах шинэ арга зам ашигладаг. Бидний систем 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 бүх Англи хэлний сурагчид EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of SemEval 2018 Task 1: Tweets-ийн нөлөө.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem prima încercare de a efectua transferul de învățare de la sentiment la emoții. Sistemul nostru utilizează rețele LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory), inclusiv LSTM bidirecțional (biLSTM) și LSTM cu mecanism de atenție. Realizăm transferul de învățare prin pre-instruirea rețelelor LSTM pe date sentimentale înainte de a concatena penultimele straturi ale acestor rețele într-un singur vector ca intrare în noi straturi dense. Pentru subactivitatea E-c, utilizăm o abordare nouă pentru a instrui modele pentru clasele emoționale corelate. Sistemul nostru efectuează 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 pe toate subactivitățile în limba engleză EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c ale SemEval 2018 Task 1: Afect în Tweets.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo prvi pokušaj da izvedemo prebacivanje učenja iz osjećaja na emocije. Naš sistem koristi dugoročnu memoriju (LSTM) mrežu, uključujući bidirektivnu LSTM (biLSTM) i LSTM sa pažnjom mehanizam. Izvodimo učenje prevođenja prvim predobukom mreža LSTM na podacima sentimenta prije nego što potvrdimo konačne slojeve mreža u jednog vektora kao ulaz u nove guste slojeve. Za podpitanje e-c, koristimo novi pristup treniranju modela za korelacijske klase emocija. Naš sistem izvodi 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 na svim engleskim podacima EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c od semiEval 2018 Task 1: Afekt na Tweets.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa isku dayada ugu horeysa in aan sameeyo waxbarashada ka wareejinta fikrada iyo fikrada. Systemkanagu wuxuu ku shaqeeyaa shabakado dheer-Term xasuus (LSTM) oo ku jira wadajir LSTM (biLSTM) iyo LSTM, iyadoo ay ku haystaan dhegaysan mechanism. Waxbarashada ugu horraysa ayaannu ku sameynaa shabakada LSTM ee ku saabsan macluumaadka xisaabta ka hor inta aan la sameyn qaybaha ugu dambeysan ee shabakadahan u dhigno wado kali ah sida wax laguugu geliyo saqaha cusub. Shaqaalaha E-c waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaabab saxda ah si aynu u u tababarinno samooyinka tababarada isqabsashada. Our system performs 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 on all English subtasks EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen beskriver vi det första försöket att utföra transfer learning från sentiment till känslor. Vårt system använder Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) nätverk, inklusive dubbelriktad LSTM (biLSTM) och LSTM med uppmärksamhetsmekanism. Vi utför överföringsinlärning genom att först förbereda LSTM-nätverken på sentimentdata innan vi sammanfogar de näst sista lagren av dessa nätverk till en enda vektor som input till nya täta lager. För E-c subaktivitet använder vi ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för att träna modeller för korrelerade känsloklasser. Vårt system utför 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 på alla engelska underaktiviteter EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c av SemEval 2018 Uppgift 1: Påverkan i tweets.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் உணர்வுகளிலிருந்து உணர்வுகளுக்கு மாற்ற கற்றத்தை செய்ய முதல் முயற்சியை விவரிக்கி எங்கள் அமைப்பு நீண்ட சிறிய நினைவகம் (LSTM) வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, சேர்ந்த LSTM (biLSTM) மற்றும் LSTM கவனம் முறைமையை கொண்டு. நாம் முதலில் பயிற்சி முன்னால் மாற்றி கற்றுக் கொண்டு மாற்றுதலை செய்கிறோம் உணர்வு தகவல்களின் மீது LSTM பிணையங்களை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம் இந E-c துணை பணிக்கு, நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி இணைப்பு உணர்வு வகுப்புகளுக்கு மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய் எங்கள் அமைப்பு 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 அனைத்து ஆங்கிலத்தின் உப துணை பணிகள் EI- reg, EI- oc, V- reg, V- oc, SemEval 2018 பணியின் E-c: Tweets விளைவு', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلی کوشش کی توصیف کرتے ہیں کہ احساسات سے سیکھنے کو احساسات تک پہنچانے کی کوشش کریں۔ ہماری سیستم نے طویل لنگ ٹریم میموری (LSTM) نیٹ ورک کو استعمال کرتا ہے، اس کے ساتھ دوسری طرح کی LSTM (biLSTM) اور LSTM (LSTM) کو توجه مکانیزم کے ساتھ استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ہم پہلے پہلے LSTM نیٹ ورک کو احساسات ڈیٹے پر ترنسیٹ سیکھنے کے ذریعہ سفارش کرتے ہیں اس نیٹ ورک کے پانٹینٹ لائٹوں کو ایک واکتور میں نئی ڈیٹ لائٹوں کے لئے وارد کرنا چاہتے ہیں۔ E-c subtask کے لئے، ہم ایک نو طریقہ استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ مسابقات احساسات کلاس کے لئے مدلکوں کی تعلیم کریں. ہماری سیسٹم 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 تمام انگلیسی مضبوطی EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of SemEval 2018 Task 1: Tweets میں اثر.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරථම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා දැනුම් වලින් දැනුම් වලට ඉගෙන ගන්න අපේ පද්ධතිය ලොකු කාලකාලක මතකය (LSTM) ජාලය භාවිත කරනවා, අවධාන පද්ධතියෙන් අවධාන LSTM (biLSTM) සහ LSTM සමග. අපි මුලින්ම LSTM ජාලය ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා කරනවා මේ ජාලයේ අන්තිම ස්ථානයක් එක්ක වෙක්ටර් වලට අළුත් ස්ථානයකට ඇතුළු වෙන්න කලින E-c සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප අපේ පද්ධතිය 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35, EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of semeval 2018 Job 1: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz hissiyotdan o'rganishni o'rganishga o'rganishga birinchi jarayoni anglatamiz. Bizning tizimimiz juda qisqa xotira (LSTM) tarmoqlarini ishlayapdi, biLSTM (biLSTM) va LSTM (biLSTM) va maktab mekanisme bilan ishlaydi. Biz birinchi o'rganishdan oldin o'rganish uchun LSTM tarmoqlarini foydalanishimiz va bu tarmoqning eng oxirgi qatlamlarni bir vectorga kiritishdan oldin, yangi qiyin qatlamga kiritishdan oldin. E-C sub-vazifasi uchun biz bir novel usulni ishlatamiz va bir xil hissiyalar sinflari uchun modellarni o'rganish uchun foydalanamiz. Bizning tizimimiz 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 hamma ingliz tub vazifalarda EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, SemEval 2018 Vazifaning E-C 1: Twitterda Effektlar.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả nỗ lực đầu tiên để thực hiện chuyển giao học từ cảm xúc sang cảm xúc. Hệ thống của chúng tôi dùng mạng bộ nhớ ngắn hạn (LSTM) bao gồm cả cử tri LSTM (biaLSTM) và LSTM với cơ chế tập trung. Chúng tôi thực hiện việc học chuyển nhượng đầu tiên bằng việc huấn luyện hệ thống LSD trên dữ liệu tình cảm trước khi đạt được cấp tối cao của các mạng lưới này thành một véc- tơ để nhập vào lớp dày mới. Đối với c ác lớp phụ đề E-c, chúng tôi sử dụng một phương pháp mới để huấn luyện các mô hình cảm xúc tương quan. Hệ thống c ủa chúng tôi thực hiện 4/48, 3/339, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 trên tất cả các công việc khẩn cấp quốc tế theo dạng Anh quốc, ei-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c của SemEvl 208 Task 1: nhạy bén trong Tweet.', 'bg': 'В тази статия описваме първия опит за извършване на трансферно обучение от чувства към емоции. Нашата система използва мрежи за дългосрочна краткосрочна памет (ЛСТМ), включително двупосочни ЛСТМ (биЛСТМ) и ЛСТМ с механизъм за внимание. Ние извършваме трансферно обучение чрез първо предварително обучение на мрежите за сентиментални данни, преди да конкатенираме предпоследните слоеве на тези мрежи в един вектор като вход към нови плътни слоеве. За подзадачата използваме нов подход за обучение на модели за корелационни емоционални класове. Нашата система изпълнява 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 на всички английски подзадачи Задача 1: Въздействие в туитове.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo prvi pokušaj da izvedemo prijenos iz osjećaja emocijama. Naš sustav koristi dugoročnu sjećanje (LSTM) mreže, uključujući bidirektivnu LSTM (biLSTM) i LSTM s pažnjom mehanizam. Izvodimo učenje prijenosa prvim predobukom mreža LSTM-a o podacima osjećaja prije nego što potvrdimo konačne slojeve tih mreža u jednog vektora kao ulaz u nove guste slojeve. Za podpitanje e-c, koristimo novi pristup treniranju modela za korelacijske klase emocija. Naš sustav obavlja 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 o svim engleskim podupicama EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c od semiEval 2018 zadatak 1: utjecaj na Tweets.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi det første forsøg på at udføre overførsel af læring fra følelser til følelser. Vores system anvender Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) netværk, herunder bidirectional LSTM (biLSTM) og LSTM med opmærksomhedsmekanisme. Vi udfører overførselslæring ved først at træne LSTM-netværket på sentimentdata, før vi sammenkobler de næstsidste lag af disse netværk i en enkelt vektor som input til nye tætte lag. Til E-c underopgaven bruger vi en ny tilgang til at træne modeller til korrelerede følelsesklasser. Vores system udfører 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 på alle engelske underopgaver EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c af SemEval 2018 Opgave 1: Påvirkning i tweets.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we de eerste poging om transferleren uit te voeren van sentiment naar emoties. Ons systeem maakt gebruik van Long Short Term Memory (LSTM) netwerken, waaronder bidirectioneel LSTM (biLSTM) en LSTM met aandachtsmechanisme. We voeren transfer learning uit door eerst de LSTM-netwerken te trainen op sentimentgegevens voordat we de voorlaatste lagen van deze netwerken in één enkele vector aaneensluiten als input voor nieuwe dichte lagen. Voor de E-c subtaak gebruiken we een nieuwe benadering om modellen te trainen voor gecorreleerde emotieklassen. Ons systeem voert 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 uit op alle Engelse subtaken EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c van SemEval 2018 Taak 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir den ersten Versuch, Transferlernen von Gefühlen zu Emotionen durchzuführen. Unser System verwendet Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM)-Netzwerke, einschließlich bidirektionaler LSTM (biLSTM) und LSTM mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus. Wir führen Transferlernen durch, indem wir zunächst die LSTM-Netzwerke auf Stimmungsdaten vorbereiten, bevor wir die vorletzten Schichten dieser Netzwerke zu einem einzigen Vektor als Eingabe für neue dichte Schichten verketten. Für den E-c Subtask verwenden wir einen neuartigen Ansatz, um Modelle für korrelierte Emotionsklassen zu trainieren. Unser System führt 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 auf allen englischen Teilaufgaben EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c von SemEval 2018 Aufgabe 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'id': 'Dalam koran ini, kami menggambarkan percobaan pertama untuk melakukan transfer belajar dari perasaan ke emosi. Sistem kami menggunakan jaringan Memori Panjang Panjang (LSTM), termasuk LSTM bidireksi (biLSTM) dan LSTM dengan mekanisme perhatian. We perform transfer learning by first pre-training the LSTM networks on sentiment data before concatenating the penultimate layers of these networks into a single vector as input to new dense layers.  Untuk subtask E-c, kita menggunakan pendekatan baru untuk melatih model untuk kelas emosi yang berkorelasi. Sistem kami melakukan 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 pada semua subtasks Inggris EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c dari SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, duýgulardan duýgular tarapyndan öwrenmek üçin ilkinji synanyşyny düşünýäris. Biziň sistemimiz gysga wagtlar ýagtylygy (LSTM) aýtlaryny ulanýar, bidireksiyonal LSTM (biLSTM) we LSTM üns meýdançasynda. Biz bu a ğların en son katlarını bir vektöre sokmadan önce LSTM ağlarını duygular verileri üzerinde ilk öğrenmek üzere işleriz. E-k alt soragy üçin, duýgular synplary üçin nusgalary öwrenmek üçin bir nusga gollanýarys. Bizim sistemimiz 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 처음으로 정서에서 정서로의 이동 학습을 집행하려고 시도했다.우리 시스템은 양방향 LSTM(bilSTM)과 주의 메커니즘을 갖춘 LSTM을 포함한 장단시간 기억(LSTM) 네트워크를 채택하고 있다.우리는 먼저 감정 데이터에서 LSTM 네트워크에 대해 사전 훈련을 한 다음에 이 네트워크의 밑의 두 번째 층을 하나의 벡터로 연결하여 새로운 밀집층의 입력으로 삼아 이동 학습을 집행한다.E-c 하위 임무에 대해 우리는 새로운 방법을 사용하여 관련 정서류의 모델을 훈련한다.우리 시스템이 SemEval 2018 퀘스트 1: 트윗에 영향을 미친 모든 영문 하위 퀘스트 EI reg, EI oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c는 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35를 수행한다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea jaribio la kwanza la kutekeleza kujifunza kutoka hisia hadi hisia. Mfumo wetu unatumia mitandao ya kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu (LSTM), ikiwa ni pamoja na mfumo wa LSTM (biLSTM) na LSTM kwa kutumia mfumo wa kusikiliza. Tunafanya kujifunza kwa mafunzo ya kwanza ya kufundisha mitandao ya LSTM kwenye taarifa za hisia kabla ya kukutana na vipande vya mwisho vya mitandao haya kuwa vector moja kama inavyoingizwa kwenye vipande vipya vya ndani. For the E-c subtask, we utilize a novel approach to train models for correlated emotion classes.  Mfumo wetu unafanya kazi 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 kuhusu kazi zote za Kiingereza EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, E-c wa SemEval 2018 Task 1: Inaathirika kwenye twita.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما اولین تلاش برای انتقال یادگیری از احساسات به احساسات توصیف می کنیم. سیستم ما شبکه های حافظه کوتاه زمانی (LSTM) را استفاده می کند، شامل LSTM (biLSTM) و LSTM با مکانیزم توجه. ما با اولین پیش آموزش شبکه\u200cهای LSTM در مورد داده\u200cهای احساسات پیش از اینکه لایه\u200cهای نهایت این شبکه\u200cها را به یک واکتور تبدیل کنیم به عنوان ورودی به لایه\u200cهای وحشتناک جدید انجام می\u200cدهیم. برای پایتپرس E-c، ما یک طریق رمانی برای آموزش مدلها برای کلاس احساسات متصل می کنیم. سیستم ما 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 روی تمام زیر استفاده\u200cهای انگلیسی EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c از نیم\u200cEval 2018 Task 1: Effects in Tweets.', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskryf ons die eerste probeer om oordra te doen van sentiment na emosies. Ons stelsel gebruik Long- Term Memory (LSTM) netwerke, insluitend bidirectional LSTM (biLSTM) en LSTM met aandagmekanisme. Ons uitvoer oordrag leer deur eerste voor-oefening van die LSTM netwerke op sentimente data voor die penultimate laagte van hierdie netwerke in 'n enkele vektor as invoer na nuwe dens laagte. Vir die E-c-subvraag, gebruik ons 'n nuwe toegang om modele te trein vir korrelasieerde emosie klasse. Ons stelsel uitvoer 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 op alle Engelse subtaske EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c van SemEval 2018 Taak 1: Afteken in Tweets.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë përpjekjen e parë për të kryer transferimin e mësimit nga ndjenja në emocione. Sistemi ynë përdor rrjete të kujtesës së afatit të gjatë (LSTM), duke përfshirë dy drejtime LSTM (biLSTM) dhe LSTM me mekanizëm vëmendje. Ne kryejmë mësimin e transferimit duke paratrajnuar rrjetet LSTM në të dhënat e ndjenjave përpara se të bashkojmë shtresat e para të përfundimit të këtyre rrjeteve në një vektor të vetëm si hyrje në shtresa të reja të dendura. Për nënpyetjen e E-c, ne përdorim një metodë të re për të trajnuar modelet për klasat e emocioneve të lidhura. Sistemi ynë kryen 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 në të gjitha subtasket angleze EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c të SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የመጀመሪያውን ትምህርት ከስሜት ወደ እውቀት ለመለስ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ስርዓታችን የረጅም ዘመን ማስታወሻ (LSTM) መረብ፣ አካባቢ LSTM (biLSTM) እና LSTM በመጠየቅ ስርዓት ይሠራል፡፡ እነዚህን መረብ የመጨረሻውን ደረጃዎች ወደ አንዲት vector እንደሚገባ አዲስ ደረጃዎች ከመገናኘት በፊት የLSTM መረብ በመስማት ማድረግ በመጀመሪያ ትምህርት ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለኢ-c ደብዳቤ፣ የኢ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አዳራጊ የ ስርዓታችን 4/48፣ 3/39፣ 8/38፣ 4/37፣ 4/35 በኢንግሊዝኛ ደብዳቤዎች ሁሉ EI-reg፣ EI-oc፣ V-reg፣ የሴmEval 2018 ስራ ስራ 1: በትዊተር ላይ ጥቅም ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքում մենք նկարագրում ենք առաջին փորձը զգացմունքներից զգացմունքներին փոխանցելու համար: Our system employs Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) networks, including bidirectional LSTM (biLSTM) and LSTM with attention mechanism.  Մենք իրականացնում ենք փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունը առաջին նախապատրաստման միջոցով LSMT ցանցերը զգացմունքային տվյալների վրա, մինչ այդ ցանցերի նախավերջին շերտերը միայն մեկ վեկտոր դարձնելը որպես ներմուծք նոր խտուն շերտերի վրա: E-c ենթախնդրի համար մենք օգտագործում ենք նոր մոտեցում կապված զգացմունքների դասերի մոդելների ուսուցման համար: Մեր համակարգը կատարում է 4-48, 3-39, 8-38, 4-37, 4-35 անգլերենի բոլոր ենթաթերթերի վրա Էլ-Ռեգ, Էլ-Օք, Վ-Ռեգ, Վ-Օք, ՍեմԵվալ 2018-ի E-C-ը՝ Աֆեկտը Թվիթերում:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda ilk öyrənmək üçün duygularından emosiyalara göndərmək üçün təfsir edirik. Sistemimiz uzun qısa zamanlı Yadın (LSTM) ağlarını istifadə edir. İddiriksiyyətli LSTM (biLSTM) və LSTM məhsaniyyəti ilə istifadə edir. Biz ilk öncə LSTM a ğlarını duygusal məlumatlardan əvvəl, bu ağların ən böyük səviyyələrini yeni yoxlu səviyyələrə daxil etmədən öncə təkrar öyrənməsini təkrar edirik. E-c subtask üçün bir yeni metod istifadə edirik ki, bənzər emosiyal sınıfları üçün modelləri təhsil etmək üçün. Sistemimiz 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 bütün İngilizce subtaskları EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c of SemEval 2018 Task 1: Tövidlərin əlaqəsi.', 'ca': "En aquest article, descrivim el primer intent de fer transfer ència d'aprenentatge del sentiment a les emocions. El nostre sistema utilitza xarxes de memòria a curt termini (LSTM), incloent LSTM bidireccional (biLSTM) i LSTM amb mecanisme d'atenció. Realitzem aprenentatge de transfer ència per primer cop pré-entrenem les xarxes LSTM sobre dades de sentiment abans de concatenar les capes penultimates d'aquestes xarxes en un únic vector com entrada a noves capes denses. Per a la subterrània E-c, utilitzem un enfocament nou per formar models per classes d'emocions correlacionades. El nostre sistema fa 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 en totes les subtaskes angleses EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c de SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রথম প্রচেষ্টাকে বর্ণনা করি যে আবেগ থেকে অনুভূতিতে শিক্ষা প্রদান করতে পারে। আমাদের সিস্টেম লম্বা সংক্ষিপ্ত মেমরি (এলসিএম) নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে, যার মধ্যে বিদ্যুত এলস্টিএম (বিএলস্টিএম) এবং এলএসএমও মনোয আমরা প্রথম প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে এলস্টিএম নেটওয়ার্ক অনুভূতির তথ্য নিয়ে শিক্ষা প্রদান করি এই নেটওয়ার্কের পেন্টিমেন্টেলের স্তরে এক ভ ই-সি সাবটার্কের জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস ব্যবহার করি সংশ্লিষ্ট আবেগ ক্লাসের জন্য মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য। আমাদের সিস্টেম ৪/48, ৩/39, ৮/38, ৪/37, ৪/৩৫ ইংরেজী সাবটাকাজ ইআই-রেগ, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, সেমভাল ২০১৮ টুইটে প্রভাবিত।', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme první pokus o provedení transferového učení ze sentimentu k emocím. Náš systém využívá sítě Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM), včetně obousměrného LSTM (biLSTM) a LSTM s mechanismem pozornosti. Přenosové učení provádíme nejprve předškolením LSTM sítí na sentimentových datech a předposledními vrstvami těchto sítí do jediného vektoru jako vstup do nových hustých vrstev. Pro E-c podúkol využíváme nový přístup k tréninku modelů pro korelované emoční třídy. Náš systém provádí 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 na všech anglických dílčích úkolech EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, E-c SemEvalu 2018 Úkol 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo prvi pokušaj da izvedemo prebacivanje učenja iz osjećaja na emocije. Naš sistem koristi dugoročnu sjećanje (LSTM) mreže, uključujući bidirektivnu LSTM (biLSTM) i LSTM sa pažnjom mehanizam. Izvodimo učenje prijenosa prvim predobukom mreža LSTM na podacima osjećaja prije nego što zatvorimo najbolji sloji ovih mreža u jednog vektora kao ulaz u nove guste slojeve. Za podpitanje e-c, koristimo novi pristup treniranju modela za korelacijske klase emocija. Naš sistem izvodi 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 na svim engleskim podacima EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c od semiEval 2018 Task 1: Afekt na Tweets.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame esimest katset teostada ülekandmist tundest emotsioonidele. Meie süsteem kasutab pikaajalist lühiajalist mälu (LSTM) võrke, sealhulgas kahesuunalist LSTM (biLSTM) ja tähelepanumehhanismiga LSTM. Me teostame siirdeõpet LSTM võrkude esimese eelkoolitusega sentimentaalsete andmete põhjal, enne kui ühendame nende võrkude eelviimased kihid üheks vektoriks sisendiks uutele tihedatele kihtidele. E-c alamülesande puhul kasutame uudset lähenemisviisi korrelatsiooniklasside mudelite koolitamiseks. Meie süsteem täidab 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 kõikidel inglise alamülesannetel EI-reg, EI-oc, V-oc, E-c SemEval 2018 ülesanne 1: mõju tweetides.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme ensimmäistä yritystä suorittaa siirtooppimista tunteesta tunteisiin. Järjestelmämme käyttää Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) -verkkoja, mukaan lukien kaksisuuntaiset LSTM (biLSTM) ja LSTM huomiomekanismilla. Suoritamme siirtooppimista esikouluttamalla LSTM-verkostoja sentimentaalidatalla ennen kuin yhdistämme näiden verkkojen viimeiset kerrokset yhdeksi vektoriksi syötteenä uusiin tiheisiin kerroksiin. E-c alatehtävässä käytämme uudenlaista lähestymistapaa korreloituneiden tunneluokkien mallien kouluttamiseen. Järjestelmämme suorittaa 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 kaikissa englannin alatehtävissä EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c SemEval 2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana ta farkon jarrabar ta sami da za'a shige sanar ta daga hisia zuwa hisia. Ubuntu na'urar da ke amfani da jerin Narrabi'in Naurar-Lokaci Mu sami motsi da za'a yi amfani da amfani da farkon ta yi amfani da tsarin LSSM a kan data na hisia gabãnin ka sami fili masu ƙaranci wa waɗannan mitanda zuwa wata hanya guda kamar an shigar zuwa zane-zane na sauri. Ga sub-aikin e-c, za mu yi amfani da wata matsayi na nowaya don mu kõre misãlai wa danne-danne na danganta. Ana tafiyar da aikin mu 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 a kan dukkan aikin Ingiriya EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, e-c of Semeval 2018 Tafiyar 1: Affect in Twitter.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים את הניסיון הראשון לבצע העברה ללמוד מרגישה לרגשות. המערכת שלנו משתמשת ברשתות זיכרון ארוכה לטווח קצר (LSTM), כולל LSTM bidirectional (biLSTM) ו LSTM עם מנגנון תשומת לב. אנו מבצעים לימוד העברה על ידי האימונים הראשונים של רשתות LSTM על נתוני רגשות לפני שיתוף את שכבות העתיקות של הרשתות האלה לווקטור אחד ככניסה לשכבות צפויות חדשות. לתת-שאלה E-c, אנחנו משתמשים בגישה חדשה לאימון דוגמנים לשיעורי רגשות מקושרים. המערכת שלנו מבצעת 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 על כל התשומות האנגליות EI-reg, EI-oc, V-reg, V-oc, E-c של SemEval 2018 משימה 1: Affect in Tweets.', 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo prvi poskus izvajanja prenosnega učenja iz čustva v čustva. Naš sistem uporablja omrežja Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM), vključno z dvosmernim LSTM (biLSTM) in LSTM z mehanizmom pozornosti. Izvajamo prenosno učenje s prvim predusposabljanjem mrež LSTM na sentimentalnih podatkih, preden predzadnje plasti teh omrežij združimo v en sam vektor kot vhod v nove goste plasti. Za podnalogo E-c uporabljamo nov pristop k usposabljanju modelov za korelacijske razrede čustev. Naš sistem izvaja 4/48, 3/39, 8/38, 4/37, 4/35 na vseh angleških podnalogah EI-reg, EI-oc, V-oc, E-c SemEval 2018 Naloga 1: Vpliv v tweets.', 'jv': 'Nang kuwi punika, kéné ngerasakno uwis seneng nggawe mulai nggawe ngerasar seneng luwih apik karo hal omongaké. Sistem dhéwé éntuk sistem sistem sing nggawe Perintah Latar-Latar mempernik (LTT M), gambar ditambah barang nggawe LOT (BiLTT M) lan LOT Mehanis. Kernel Panjenengan E-c kang mbukak, awak dhéwé nggunakake dadi bener kanggo luwih model kanggo kelas omongaké sing dirampakan. Kita sistem sungane 4/48o, 3/49, 8/3, 4/31, 4/34, 4/34 on all Inggris Subtasks', 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ང་ཚོས་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་པོ་སྤྱིར་ཐབས་རྩོལ་བ་ཡིན་པས། Our system employs Long-Term Memory (LSTM) networks, including bidirectional LSTM (biLSTM) and LSTM with attention mechanism. We perform transfer learning by first pre-training the LSTM networks on sentiment data before concatenating the penultimate layers of these networks into a single vector as input to new dense layers. E-c ཡིས་གཟུགས་ཕྱོགས་ལ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྤྱོད་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་ཨིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཕྱེད་སྡུད་རྒྱལ་བཞིན་དང་། ༤༨། ༣། ༨། ༨། ༤༨། ༤༣། ༤༣། ༡༥. ཨིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འབྲི་ཚང་མའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོངས་བསྡད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'UIUC at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Recognizing Affect with Ensemble Models', 'ar': 'UIUC في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: التعرف على التأثير مع نماذج المجموعات', 'fr': "UIUC au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: Reconnaître l'affect avec des modèles d'ensemble", 'es': 'UIUC en SemEval-2018 Tarea 1: Reconocer el afecto con los modelos de conjunto', 'pt': 'UIUC no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Reconhecendo o efeito com modelos de conjunto', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のUIUCタスク1 ：アンサンブルモデルとの影響の認識', 'zh': 'UIUC at SemEval-2018 务 1:用成形', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 1 पर UIUC: Ensemble मॉडल के साथ प्रभाव को पहचानना', 'ru': 'UIUC на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Распознавание влияния с помощью ансамблевых моделей', 'ga': 'UIUC ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Tionchar le Múnlaí Ensemble a Aithint', 'ka': 'UIUC semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 1: შესახებ მოდელთან შეცდომა', 'hu': 'UIUC a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Az együttesmodellek hatásának felismerése', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Αναγνώριση της επίδρασης με μοντέλα συνόλων', 'kk': 'UIUC 1- тапсырма 1- шегінің шегінде: Шығыс үлгілерімен қатынасын анықтау', 'lt': 'UIUC 1 užduotis – pripažinti poveikį bendriems modeliams', 'mk': 'УИУК на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Признавање на влијанието врз ансембелните модели', 'it': "UIUC a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Riconoscere l'impatto con i modelli di Ensemble", 'ms': 'UIUC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Mengenal Kesan dengan Model Ensemble', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1- ല്\u200d യുയുസി', 'mt': 'UIUC fis-SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Ir-Rikonoxximent tal-Affett mal-Mudelli Ensemble', 'mn': 'UIUC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Recognizing Effect with Ensemble Models', 'no': 'UIUC ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Gjennomsiktig effekt med spelble modeller', 'ro': 'UIUC la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Recunoașterea afectului cu modelele de ansamblu', 'pl': 'UIUC na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Rozpoznawanie efektu z modelami zespołowymi', 'sr': 'UIUC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: prepoznavanje utjecaja sa uzbuđenim modelima', 'sv': 'UIUC på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Att känna igen påverkan med ensemblemodeller', 'si': 'UIUC at Halfeval-2018 Label 1: Ensemble Models with Reasoning Affects', 'so': 'UIUC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Recognizing Affect with Ensemable Models', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் UIUC 1: சாதாரண மாதிரிகளுடன் விளைவை அறியும்', 'ur': 'UIUC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Ensemble Models with Effect Recognizing', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Công việc của UUC tại SemEvol-208: Nhận biết tác động với mô- Grenada', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Разпознаване на влиянието върху моделите на ансамбъла', 'hr': 'UIUC na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 1: prepoznavanje utjecaja s uzbuđenim modelima', 'da': 'UIUC på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Anerkendelse af påvirkning med Ensemble modeller', 'id': 'UIUC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Mengenal Affect dengan Model Ensemble', 'de': 'UIUC bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 1: Affekt mit Ensemblemodellen erkennen', 'ko': 'UIUC의 SemEval-18년도 작업 1: 통합 모델로 영향 식별', 'sw': 'UIUC kwenye SemEval-2018 Kazi 1: Kutambua Afya na Modeli Zisizopatikana', 'tr': 'UIUC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Etkinleşen nusgalar bilen tanaýar', 'nl': 'UIUC bij SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Affect herkennen met ensemblemodellen', 'af': 'UIUC by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 1: Onbekende Afteks met Ensemble Models', 'sq': 'UIUC në SemEval-2018 Task 1: Recognizing Affect with Ensemble Models', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'fa': 'UIUC در کار ۱ نیم Eval-۲۰۰۸: شناسایی اثر با مدل\u200cهای انفجار', 'bs': 'UIUC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: prepoznavanje utjecaja sa uzbuđenim modelima', 'hy': 'UIUC-ը 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի առաջին հանձնարարությունում. Անշուշտ մոդելների հետ ազդեցության ճանաչելը', 'az': 'UIUC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Ensemble Modell…ôri il…ô ∆èlaq…ôtl…ôndirm…ôsi', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ইউইউসি: সেমেবল মডেলের সাথে প্রভাব চিনতে পারে', 'cs': 'Úkol 1: Rozpoznání vlivu s modely souborů', 'et': 'UIUC SemEval-2018 ülesanne 1: mõju tunnustamine ansambli mudelitega', 'fi': 'UIUC SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Vaikutuksen tunnistaminen yhtyemalleihin', 'ca': 'UIUC a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Recognizing Affect with Ensemble Models', 'jv': 'user', 'sk': 'UIUC na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: prepoznavanje vpliva na modele ansambla', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'he': 'UIUC ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: זיהוי השפעה עם מודלים Ensemble', 'bo': 'UIUC at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Recognizing Affect with Ensemble Models'}
{'en': 'Our submission to the SemEval-2018 Task1 : Affect in Tweets shared task competition is a supervised learning model relying on standard lexicon features coupled with word embedding features. We used an ensemble of diverse models, including random forests, gradient boosted trees, and linear models, corrected for training-development set mismatch. We submitted the system’s output for subtasks 1 (emotion intensity prediction), 2 (emotion ordinal classification), 3 (valence intensity regression) and 4 (valence ordinal classification), for English tweets. We placed 25th, 19th, 24th and 15th in the four subtasks respectively. The baseline considered was an SVM (Support Vector Machines) model with linear kernel on the lexicon and embedding based features. Our system’s final performance measured in Pearson correlation scores outperformed the baseline by a margin of 2.2 % to 14.6 % across all tasks.', 'ar': 'إن تقديمنا إلى مسابقة SemEval-2018 Task1: التأثير في مسابقة المهام المشتركة هو نموذج تعليمي خاضع للإشراف يعتمد على ميزات المعجم القياسية إلى جانب ميزات تضمين الكلمات. استخدمنا مجموعة من النماذج المتنوعة ، بما في ذلك الغابات العشوائية ، والأشجار المعززة بالتدرج ، والنماذج الخطية ، المصححة لعدم تطابق مجموعة التدريب والتطوير. قدمنا مخرجات النظام للمهام الفرعية 1 (توقع شدة العاطفة) و 2 (تصنيف ترتيبي للعاطفة) و 3 (انحدار كثافة التكافؤ) و 4 (تصنيف التكافؤ الترتيبي) للتغريدات الإنجليزية. وضعنا 25 و 19 و 24 و 15 في المهام الفرعية الأربع على التوالي. كان خط الأساس الذي تم النظر فيه هو نموذج SVM (آلات المتجهات الداعمة) مع نواة خطية على المعجم والميزات القائمة على التضمين. تفوق الأداء النهائي لنظامنا الذي تم قياسه في درجات ارتباط بيرسون على خط الأساس بهامش 2.2٪ إلى 14.6٪ عبر جميع المهام.', 'fr': "Notre soumission au concours de tâches partagées SEMEVAL-2018 Task1\xa0: Affect in Tweets est un modèle d'apprentissage supervisé qui repose sur des fonctionnalités de lexique standard associées à des fonctionnalités d'intégration de mots. Nous avons utilisé un ensemble de modèles divers, y compris des forêts aléatoires, des arbres à gradient amplifié et des modèles linéaires, corrigés pour tenir compte de l'inadéquation entre les ensembles de formation et de développement. Nous avons soumis la sortie du système pour les sous-tâches 1 (prédiction de l'intensité des émotions), 2 (classification ordinale des émotions), 3 (régression de l'intensité de valence) et 4 (classification ordinale de valence), pour les tweets en anglais. Nous nous sommes classés 25e, 19e, 24e et 15e respectivement dans les quatre sous-tâches. La référence considérée était un modèle SVM (Support Vector Machines) avec un noyau linéaire sur le lexique et des fonctionnalités basées sur l'intégration. Les performances finales de notre système mesurées dans les scores de corrélation de Pearson ont surpassé la valeur de référence d'une marge de 2,2\xa0% à 14,6\xa0% pour toutes les tâches.", 'pt': 'Nosso envio para a competição de tarefas compartilhadas SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets é um modelo de aprendizado supervisionado baseado em recursos de léxico padrão combinados com recursos de incorporação de palavras. Usamos um conjunto de diversos modelos, incluindo florestas aleatórias, árvores impulsionadas por gradiente e modelos lineares, corrigidos para incompatibilidade de conjunto de treinamento-desenvolvimento. Submetemos a saída do sistema para as subtarefas 1 (previsão de intensidade de emoção), 2 (classificação ordinal de emoção), 3 (regressão de intensidade de valência) e 4 (classificação ordinal de valência), para tweets em inglês. Ficamos em 25º, 19º, 24º e 15º nas quatro subtarefas, respectivamente. A linha de base considerada foi um modelo SVM (Support Vector Machines) com kernel linear no léxico e recursos baseados em embedding. O desempenho final do nosso sistema medido nas pontuações de correlação de Pearson superou a linha de base por uma margem de 2,2% a 14,6% em todas as tarefas.', 'es': 'Nuestra presentación a la competencia Tarea 1 de SemEval-2018: Affect in Tweets es un modelo de aprendizaje supervisado que se basa en funciones de léxico estándar junto con funciones de incrustación de palabras. Utilizamos un conjunto de modelos diversos, incluidos bosques aleatorios, árboles con aumento de gradiente y modelos lineales, corregidos por la falta de coincidencia de conjuntos de desarrollo de entrenamiento. Presentamos la salida del sistema para las subtareas 1 (predicción de intensidad de emoción), 2 (clasificación ordinal de emociones), 3 (regresión de intensidad de valencia) y 4 (clasificación ordinal de valencia), para tuits en inglés. Quedamos en el puesto 25, 19, 24 y 15 en las cuatro subtareas, respectivamente. La línea de base considerada fue un modelo SVM (máquinas de vectores de soporte) con núcleo lineal en el léxico y características basadas en incrustación. El rendimiento final de nuestro sistema, medido en las puntuaciones de correlación de Pearson, superó al de referencia en un margen del 2,2% al 14,6% en todas las tareas.', 'zh': '臣等言SemEval-2018 Task1:推文之化,共为督学,赖于准的词典功与词。 用诸模之会,随机林梯度升树线性,开集不-。 其于英语推文也,子职 1(情度)、2(情序数类)、3(价强归)、 4(价序数)者输之。 四子之职,排名第 25、19、24 、 15。 虑之基线者,SVM(持向量机)形,有线性核和于词典者也。 统以 Pearson 量之终,终于一切之中均以 2.2% 至 14.6% 之幅度走赢基线。', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets shared task competitionへの提出は、標準的な語彙機能と単語埋め込み機能に依存した監視学習モデルです。ランダムフォレスト、グラデーションブーストツリー、およびトレーニング開発セットの不一致を修正した線形モデルを含む多様なモデルのアンサンブルを使用しました。英語のツイートでは、サブタスク1 （感情強度予測）、2 （感情順分類）、3 （価強度回帰）、4 （価順分類）のシステム出力を提出した。4つのサブタスクでそれぞれ25位、19位、24位、15位に配置しました。ベースラインはSVM (Support Vector Machines)モデルと考えられ、Lexiconに直線カーネルを搭載し、ベースの機能を埋め込んでいた。ピアソン相関スコアで測定された当社システムの最終パフォーマンスは、すべてのタスクで2.2 ％から14.6 ％のマージンでベースラインを上回りました。', 'ru': 'Наше участие в конкурсе общих задач SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets - это модель обучения под наблюдением, основанная на стандартных функциях лексики в сочетании с функциями встраивания слов. Мы использовали ансамбль разнообразных моделей, включая случайные леса, деревья с градиентным усилением и линейные модели, скорректированные на несоответствие набора обучения и развития. Мы представили результаты системы для подзадач 1 (прогнозирование интенсивности эмоций), 2 (порядковая классификация эмоций), 3 (регрессия интенсивности валентности) и 4 (порядковая классификация валентности) для английских твитов. Мы разместили 25, 19, 24 и 15 места в четырех подзадачах соответственно. В качестве базовой рассматривалась модель SVM (Support Vector Machines) с линейным ядром на лексиконе и функциями, основанными на встраивании. Окончательная эффективность нашей системы, измеренная в баллах корреляции Пирсона, превзошла базовую на 2,2-14,6% во всех задачах.', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 Task1 के लिए हमारा सबमिशन: ट्वीट्स साझा कार्य प्रतियोगिता में प्रभाव एक पर्यवेक्षित सीखने का मॉडल है जो शब्द एम्बेडिंग सुविधाओं के साथ युग्मित मानक शब्दकोश सुविधाओं पर निर्भर करता है। हमने यादृच्छिक जंगलों, ढाल बूस्टेड पेड़ों और रैखिक मॉडल सहित विविध मॉडलों की एक टुकड़ी का उपयोग किया, जो प्रशिक्षण-विकास सेट बेमेल के लिए सही किया गया था। हमने अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स के लिए सबटास्क 1 (भावना तीव्रता भविष्यवाणी), 2 (भावना क्रमसूचक वर्गीकरण), 3 (वैलेंस तीव्रता प्रतिगमन) और 4 (वैलेंस ऑर्डिनल वर्गीकरण) के लिए सिस्टम के आउटपुट को प्रस्तुत किया। हमने चार उप-कार्यों में क्रमशः 25 वें, 19 वें, 24 वें और 15 वें स्थान पर रखा। बेसलाइन पर विचार किया गया था एक एसवीएम (समर्थन वेक्टर मशीनें) मॉडल जिसमें शब्दकोश पर रैखिक कर्नेल और एम्बेडिंग आधारित विशेषताएं थीं। पियर्सन सहसंबंध स्कोर में मापा गया हमारी प्रणाली का अंतिम प्रदर्शन सभी कार्यों में 2.2% से 14.6% के मार्जिन से बेसलाइन को पछाड़ दिया।', 'ga': 'Is múnla foghlama maoirsithe é ár n-aighneacht don chomórtas tasc comhroinnte SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets a bhraitheann ar ghnéithe caighdeánacha foclóireachta in éineacht le gnéithe leabaithe focal. D’úsáideamar ensemble de shamhlacha éagsúla, lena n-áirítear foraoisí randamacha, crainn treisithe le grádán, agus samhlacha líneacha, ceartaithe le haghaidh neamhréire tacair oiliúna-fhorbairt. Chuireamar isteach aschur an chórais le haghaidh subtascanna 1 (tuar déine mothúcháin), 2 (rangú ornáideach mothúcháin), 3 (chúlchéimniú déine valence) agus 4 (rangú ordúil valence), le haghaidh tweets Béarla. Chuireamar 25ú, 19ú, 24ú agus 15ú háit sna ceithre fhothasc faoi seach. Ba é an bonnlíne a breithníodh ná samhail SVM (Meaisíní Veicteoir Tacaíochta) le heithne líneach ar an bhfoclóir agus gnéithe bunaithe ar leabú. Bhí feidhmíocht deiridh ár gcóras, tomhaiste i scóir chomhghaolaithe Pearson, níos fearr ná an bonnlíne le corrlach 2.2% go 14.6% thar na tascanna go léir.', 'el': 'Η υποβολή μας στο διαγωνισμό κοινών εργασιών είναι ένα εποπτευμένο μοντέλο μάθησης που βασίζεται σε τυπικά χαρακτηριστικά λεξικού σε συνδυασμό με δυνατότητες ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε ένα σύνολο διαφορετικών μοντέλων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων τυχαίων δασών, δέντρων ενισχυμένων κλίσης και γραμμικών μοντέλων, διορθωμένα για την αναντιστοιχία συνόλων κατάρτισης-ανάπτυξης. Υποβάλαμε την παραγωγή του συστήματος για τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες 1 (πρόβλεψη έντασης συναισθημάτων), 2 (κανονική ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων), 3 (παλινδρόμηση έντασης valence) και 4 (κανονική ταξινόμηση valence), για τα αγγλικά tweets. Τοποθετήσαμε την 25η, 19η, 24η και 15η στις τέσσερις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες αντίστοιχα. Η βάση που εξετάστηκε ήταν ένα μοντέλο με γραμμικό πυρήνα στο λεξικό και ενσωματωμένα χαρακτηριστικά. Η τελική απόδοση του συστήματός μας, μετρημένη σε βαθμολογίες συσχέτισης Pearson, ξεπερνούσε τη γραμμή βάσης κατά περιθώριο 2,2% έως 14,6% σε όλες τις εργασίες.', 'hu': 'Jelentkezésünk a SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets megosztott feladat versenyre egy felügyelt tanulási modell, amely szabványos lexikon funkciókra és szóbeágyazási funkciókra támaszkodik. Különböző modellek együttesét használtuk, beleértve a véletlenszerű erdőket, a gradiens erősített fákat és lineáris modelleket, amelyeket az edzés-fejlesztés sorozat eltérése miatt korrigáltunk. A rendszer kimenetét az 1. (érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzés), a 2. (érzelmi rendszeres osztályozás), a 3. (valencia intenzitás regresszió) és a 4. (valencia rendszeres osztályozás) alfeladatokra küldtük be angol tweetekhez. A 25., 19., 24. és 15. helyezést helyeztük el a négy részfeladatban. A figyelembe vett alap egy SVM (Support Vector Machines) modell volt lineáris kernel a lexikon és beágyazáson alapuló funkciók. Rendszerünk Pearson korrelációs pontszámokban mért végső teljesítménye minden feladat esetében 2,2%-kal és 14,6%-kal felülmúlta a kiindulási értéket.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი სამუშაო-2018 დავალება1: სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალების კონსპენტირებაში შექმნა არის სწავლების მოდელი, რომელიც სტანდარტული ლექსიკონის ფუნქციებისთვის დაკავშირებული სიტ ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ განსხვავებული მოდელების სენემბელი, რომლებიც გამოყენებული ქალები, განსხვავებული ქალები და ლინიერი მოდელები, რომლებიც განსხვავებული განვითარებისთვის არსხვავებულ ჩვენ სისტემის გამოყენება 1-ზე (ემოციონის ინტენსტივის წარმოდგენება), 2-ზე (ემოციონის ორეულ კლასიფიკაცია), 3-ზე (გავალენსი ინტენსტივის რეგრესია) და 4-ზე (გავალენსი ორეულ კლასიფიკაცია),  ჩვენ 25-ს, 19-ს, 24-ს და 15-ს დავყენეთ შესახებ 4-ში. Name ჩვენი სისტემის ბოლო გამოყენება, რომელიც პერჟონის კორელაციის მონაცემებით, უფრო გავაკეთებულია ბაზილური ხაზი 2,2% და 14,6% უფრო გავაკეთებულია ყველა დავაკეთ', 'it': "La nostra presentazione al concorso SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets è un modello di apprendimento supervisionato che si basa su funzionalità lessicali standard accoppiate con funzionalità di incorporazione di parole. Abbiamo utilizzato un insieme di modelli diversi, tra cui foreste casuali, alberi potenziati con gradiente e modelli lineari, corretti per disallineamento del set di formazione-sviluppo. Abbiamo presentato l'output del sistema per le sottoattività 1 (previsione dell'intensità emotiva), 2 (classificazione ordinale dell'emozione), 3 (regressione dell'intensità di valenza) e 4 (classificazione ordinale della valenza), per i tweet inglesi. Abbiamo piazzato 25°, 19°, 24° e 15° rispettivamente nelle quattro sottoattività. La base considerata era un modello SVM (Support Vector Machines) con kernel lineare sul lessico e funzionalità basate sull'incorporazione. Le prestazioni finali del nostro sistema misurate nei punteggi di correlazione Pearson hanno superato la base di base di un margine dal 2,2% al 14,6% in tutte le attività.", 'kk': 'Біздің semiEval-2018 тапсырма1- іне жіберіміз: Tweets ортақ тапсырмалардың конкурсының нәтижесі - сөздерді ендіру мүмкіндіктерімен біріктірілген стандартты лексиканың мүмкіндіктеріне қатынау Біз әртүрлі моделдерді қолдандық, кездейсоқ ормандар, градиентті көтерілген ағаштар және сызық моделдерді қолдандық, оқыту жасау үшін дұрыс келмейді. Біз жүйеңіздің шығысын 1 (емоциялық теңдік таңдау), 2 (емоциялық ординалық классификациясы), 3 (валенциялық теңдік регрессиясы) және 4 (валенциялық ординалық классификациясы) ағылшын tweets үші Біз 25-ші, 19-ші, 24-ші және 15-ші суреттерді төрт суреттерде орнатдық. Негізгі жол лексиканың және ендіру негізгі мүмкіндіктерінің сызық өзегімен SVM үлгісі болды. Біздің жүйеміздің соңғы жылдамдығы Персондың корелациялық нәтижелерінде өлшемі барлық тапсырмалардың арасында 2,2% мен 14,6% деген шамамен жеткізді.', 'lt': 'Our submission to the SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets shared task competition is a supervised learning model relying on standard lexicon features coupled with word embedding features.  Naudojome įvairių modelių rinkinį, įskaitant atsitiktinius miškus, gradientus stiprinančius medžius ir linijinius modelius, ištaisytus mokymo ir plėtros rinkinio neatitikimams. Pateikėme sistemos išėjimą 1 (emocijos intensyvumo prognozė), 2 (emocijos ordininė klasifikacija), 3 (valencijos intensyvumo regresija) ir 4 (valencijos ordininė klasifikacija), anglų tweetams. 25-ąjį, 19-ąjį, 24-ąjį ir 15-ąjį pakeitėme atitinkamai į keturis paklausimus. Pagrindinė analizė buvo SVM (Paramos vektorių mašinos) modelis su linijiniu branduoliu ant leksikono ir įterpimo pagrįstomis savybėmis. Mūs ų sistemos galutiniai rezultatai, išmatuoti Pearson koreliacijos rezultatais, viršijo pradinę reikšmę nuo 2,2 % iki 14,6 % visose užduotyse.', 'mk': "Нашето поднесување на SemEval-2018 задача1: Нашата конкуренција со заеднички задачи на Твит е надгледуван модел на учење кој се потпира на стандардните лексиконски карактеристики поврзани со карактеристики на вградување на зборови. Користевме ансембл на различни модели, вклучувајќи и случајни шуми, градиенти поттикнати дрвја и линијарни модели, коригирани за несогласувањето на наборот за обука и развој. Го поднесовме излезот на системот за подпрашањата 1 (предвидување на емоционалниот интензитет), 2 (емоционална ординална класификација), 3 (регресија на валентниот интензитет) и 4 (валентна ординална класификација), за англиски твитови. Поставивме 25-ти, 19-ти, 24-ти и 15-ти во четирите потпрашања. Размислената основа беше модел на SVM (Support Vector Machines) со линијарен јадр на лексиконот и карактеристики базирани на вградување. Our system's final performance measured in Pearson correlation scores outperformed the baseline by a margin of 2.2% to 14.6% across all tasks.", 'mt': "Is-sottomissjoni tagħna lill-Kompitu SemEval-2018: Użajna ensemble ta’ mudelli varji, inklużi foresti aleatorji, siġar imsaħħaħ gradjenti, u mudelli lineari, ikkoreġuti għad-diskrepanza tas-sett ta’ taħriġ-żvilupp. Intbagħtu l-output tas-sistema għas-sottomistoqsijiet 1 (tbassir tal-intensità tal-emozzjoni), 2 (klassifikazzjoni ordinali tal-emozzjoni), 3 (rigressjoni tal-intensità tal-valenza) u 4 (klassifikazzjoni ordinali tal-valenza), għal tweets Ingliżi. Qiegħdin il-25, id-19, l-24 u l-15 fl-erba’ sottomistoqsijiet rispettivament. The baseline considered was an SVM (Support Vector Machines) model with linear kernel on the lexicon and embedding based features.  Our system's final performance measured in Pearson correlation scores outperformed the baseline by a margin of 2.2% to 14.6% across all tasks.", 'ms': "Penghantaran kami ke SemEval-2018 Task1: Kesan dalam persaingan tugas berkongsi Tweets adalah model pembelajaran yang diawasi bergantung pada ciri-ciri leksikon piawai yang ditambah dengan ciri-ciri penyambungan perkataan. Kami menggunakan kumpulan model berbeza, termasuk hutan rawak, pokok yang didorong gradien, dan model linear, diperbaiki untuk set latihan-pembangunan tidak sepadan. We submitted the system's output for subtasks 1 (emotion intensity prediction), 2 (emotion ordinal classification), 3 (valence intensity regression) and 4 (valence ordinal classification), for English tweets.  Kami meletakkan ke-25, ke-19, ke-24 dan ke-15 dalam empat sub-tanya. Pangkalan asas yang dianggap adalah model SVM (Mesin Vektor Sokongan) dengan kernel linear pada leksikon dan ciri-ciri berasaskan penyembelihan. Performasi akhir sistem kita diukur dalam skor korelasi Pearson melampaui dasar dengan margin 2.2% hingga 14.6% dalam semua tugas.", 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക്1-ലേക്ക് ഞങ്ങളുടെ കീഴ്പെടുത്തി: ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത ജോലിക്ക് പ്രതിഫലമാണ് പഠിക്കുന്നത് സാധാരണ ലെക്സിക്കന്\u200d വ നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലുകളുടെ ഒരു മാതൃകയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു. ക്രമമില്ലാത്ത കാടുകള്\u200d, ഗ്രാഗ്രേഡിയന്\u200d ബുദ്ധിപ്പിച്ച വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d,  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഫലം സബ്ട്ടേഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നിര്\u200dബന്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. 1 (ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വികാരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി, 2 (വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ ക്ല നമ്മള്\u200d നാലാമത്തെ സബ്ജിറ്റുകളില്\u200d 25, 19th, 24th and 15 നെ വെച്ചു. ലെക്സിക്സണിലും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുമുള്ള ലൈനര്\u200d കെര്\u200dണലുമുള്ള ഒരു SVM (പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d മെഷിനുകള്\u200d എന്ന ബേസ് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ അവസാനത്തെ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിന്റെ അവസാനത്തെ പരിഗണിക്കുന്നത് പേര്\u200dസണ്\u200d കോര്\u200dട്ടേഷന്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200dസില്\u200d നിന്നും', 'mn': 'Бидний SemEval-2018 Task1-д тайлбарласан: Tweets хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааны өрсөлдөөнд нөлөө үзүүлэлтийн загвар бол стандарт лексикон боловсруулалт дээр байдаг. Бид олон төрлийн загваруудыг ашиглаж, санамсаргүй ой, градиент дэвшүүлсэн мод, шулуун загваруудыг ашиглаж, дасгал хөгжлийн хөгжлийн төлөвлөгөөнд зөвшөөрөгдсөн. Бид системийн үр дүнг 1 (сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хүчний таамаглалт), 2 (сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загварын хэлбэрээр), 3 (тэнцүү intensity regression) болон 4 (тэнцүү загварын хэлбэрээр) Англи хэлний tweets дээр бичсэн. Бид 25, 19, 24, 15-ыг 4 дотроо оруулсан. Үндсэн шулуун нь Лексикон дээр шулуун kernel болон суурилуулах сууриллагаатай SVM (Vector Machines дэмжих) загвар юм. Бидний системийн сүүлийн үйл ажиллагааг Персон хоорондын холбоотой тоонууд нь суурь шугамыг 2.2% болон 14.6% бүх ажиллагааны хувьд нэмэгдүүлсэн.', 'no': 'Vårt oppgåve i semiEval-2018-oppgåve1: Påvirkning i Tweets-delte oppgåvekonkurransen er ein oversikt læringsmodell som vert tilbakekalla på standardeksikonsfunksjonar kopla med ord innebygde funksjonar. Vi brukte ein ensembel av ulike modeller, inkludert tilfeldige skog, fargeovergangskog trær og lineære modeller, korrigerte for opplæring-utviklingar. Vi sende systemets utdata for underspørsmål 1 (følelsesintensitetsforventing), 2 (følelsesklassifikasjon), 3 (valens intensitetsregresjon) og 4 (valens ordinal klassifikasjon), for engelske tweeter. Vi plassere 25, 19, 24 og 15 i dei fire underspørsmålene. Grunnlinja som er anslått er ein SVM- modell (støtte vektormaskiner) med lineær kjerne på leksikonet og innebygd baserte funksjonar. Sistemet vårt endelig utvikling målt i Pearson-korrelasjonspoeng forbetra grunnlinja med margin 2,2 % til 14,6 % over alle oppgåver.', 'pl': 'Nasze zgłoszenie do konkursu zadań współdzielonych SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets to model uczenia się nadzorowanego opierający się na standardowych funkcjach leksykonu w połączeniu z funkcjami osadzania słów. Użyliśmy zestawu różnorodnych modeli, w tym lasów losowych, drzew wzmocnionych gradientem i modeli liniowych, skorygowanych o niedopasowanie zestawu treningowego do rozwoju. Przesłaliśmy wyniki systemu dla podzadań 1 (predykcja intensywności emocji), 2 (klasyfikacja ordynalna emocji), 3 (regresja intensywności walencji) i 4 (klasyfikacja walencji ordynalnej), dla angielskich tweetów. W czterech podzadaniach umieściliśmy odpowiednio 25-ty, 19-ty, 24-ty i 15-ty. Podstawą analizowaną był model SVM (Support Vector Machines) z jądrem liniowym na leksykonie i funkcjami opartymi na osadzaniu. Ostateczna wydajność naszego systemu mierzona w wynikach korelacji Pearsona przewyższyła wartość bazową o margines od 2,2% do 14,6% we wszystkich zadaniach.', 'ro': 'Trimiterea noastră la concursul SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Afect în Tweets sarcini partajate este un model de învățare supravegheat bazat pe caracteristici lexiconice standard cuplate cu caracteristici de încorporare a cuvintelor. Am folosit un ansamblu de modele diferite, inclusiv păduri aleatorii, copaci amplificati de gradient și modele liniare, corectate pentru neconcordanța setului de formare-dezvoltare. Am prezentat rezultatele sistemului pentru subsarcinile 1 (predicția intensității emoțiilor), 2 (clasificarea ordinală emoțională), 3 (regresia intensității valenței) și 4 (clasificarea ordinală valenței), pentru tweeturile în limba engleză. Am plasat 25, 19, 24 și 15 în cele patru subactivități, respectiv. Baza luată în considerare a fost un model SVM (Support Vector Machines) cu nucleu liniar pe lexicon și caracteristici bazate pe încorporarea caracteristicilor. Performanța finală a sistemului nostru măsurată în scorurile de corelație Pearson a depășit valoarea de referință cu o marjă de 2,2% până la 14,6% pentru toate sarcinile.', 'sv': 'Vårt bidrag till tävlingen SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets delade uppgifter är en övervakad inlärningsmodell som bygger på standardlexikonfunktioner tillsammans med funktioner för att bädda in ord. Vi använde oss av en uppsättning olika modeller, inklusive slumpmässiga skogar, gradient boosted träd och linjära modeller, korrigerade för tränings-utveckling set missmatchning. Vi skickade in systemets resultat för deluppgifter 1 (prediktion av emotionell intensitet), 2 (emotionell klassificering), 3 (valens intensity regression) och 4 (valens ordinal klassificering), för engelska tweets. Vi placerade 25:e, 19:e, 24:e och 15:e i de fyra delaktiviteterna respektive. Grundlinjen som beaktades var en SVM-modell (Support Vector Machines) med linjär kärna på lexikonet och inbäddningsbaserade funktioner. Vårt systems slutliga prestanda mätt i Pearson korrelationspoäng överträffade baslinjen med en marginal på 2,2% till 14,6% för alla uppgifter.', 'sr': 'Naše podnošenje na posao semiEval-2018-1: Suosjećanje na konkurenciji zajedničkih zadataka Tweets je nadgledan model učenja koji se oslanja na standardne leksikonske funkcije povezane sa karakteristikama uključujući riječi. Koristili smo kompleks različitih modela, uključujući nasumične šume, povećane drveće, i linearne modele, ispravljene za nepovladanje treninga. Predložili smo sistemski izlaz za podatke 1 (predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete), 2 (klasifikacija emocija, 3 (regresija valencijske intenzitete) i 4 (klasifikacija odgovarajućih organa), za engleske tweets. Stavili smo 25., 19., 24. i 15. u četiri podrške. Početna linija je smatrala model SVM (Podrška vektorskim mašinama) sa linearnim kernel na leksikonu i ugrađenim funkcijama. Posljednji rezultat našeg sistema mjeren u Korelaciji Pearson a je nadmašio početnu liniju sa marginom od 2,2% do 14,6% u svim zadatkima.', 'so': 'Sujuuddayada aan u dhiibanno Shaqada SemEval-2018: Saamayn ku saabsan iskuullada ee Tweetka ah waa model waxbarasho oo ku xiran tababarada standard lexicon ee la xiriiray hadal ku saabsan. We used an ensemble of diverse models, including random forests, gradient boosted trees, and linear models, corrected for training-development set mismatch.  Waxaannu u soo dhiibnay arimaha subaxda 1 (tababar-horumar ah), 2 (tababarka tababarka asalka ah), 3 (tababarka koritaanka iyo 4 (tababarka asalka ah) iyo tweetka Ingiriiska. Waxaan afartii shabakad u dhignay qiyaas ahaan 25aad, 19aad, 24aad iyo 15aad. Tilmaamaha aasaasiga ah ee lagu tiriyey waa muusiko SVM (Supporto Vector machine) oo ku qoran qori-linear kernel oo ku saleysan lexicon iyo embedding-based gaar ah. Sameynta dhamaadka ee nidaamka ee Pearson waxaa lagu qiyaasay kooxaha xiriirka ee kooxaha la xiriira, waxayna dhamaadeen hawlaha oo dhan ka mid ah 2.2 boqolkiiba iyo 14.6 boqolkiiba.', 'si': 'අපේ සම්වේල් 2018 ක්\u200dරියාලයට පිළිබඳීම 1: ට්විට් එක්ක ක්\u200dරියාලය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප අපි වෙනස් මොඩේල් එකක් භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අවසානයෙන් කැල, ග්\u200dරේඩියාන්ට් විශේෂ වල, සහ ලේනියර් මොඩේල් එකක් සඳහා  අපි පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර අපි 25වි, 19වි, 24වි, 15වි, අන්තිමයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 4වි. @ info අපේ පද්ධතියේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරමාණය පර්සන්ගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණය 2.2% වෙනුව', 'ta': 'SemEval-2018 பணிக்கு எங்கள் கட்டளை: Tweets பகிர்ந்த பணியின் பாதிப்பு தாக்கியம் என்பது நிலையான லெக்சியன் குணங்களை நம்பும் மாதிரியான கற்றல் முறைமையாகும். நாங்கள் பல்வேறு மாதிரிகளின் மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தினோம், குறிப்பில்லாத காடுகள், கிரேடியன் மேற்பட்ட மரங்கள், மற்றும் கோடு மாத நாங்கள் துணை பணிகளுக்கான முறைமையின் வெளியீட்டை வழங்கினோம் 1 (உணர்வு மிக்க உறுதிப்பாடு, 2 (உணர்வு இயல்பான வகுப்பு, 3 (valence intensity repression) மற்றும் 4 (valence normal நாம் நான்கு துணை பணிகளில் 25வது, 19வது, 24வது, 15வதை வைத்தோம். அடிப்படை கோடு எங்கள் கணினியின் இறுதி செயல்பாடு பீர்சன் இணைப்பு மதிப்புகளில் அளக்கப்பட்டது அடிப்படைக்கோட்டில் 2.2% அடுக்கு 14.6% எல்லா பணிகளில', 'ur': 'ہمارا سامیایول-2018 ٹاکس۱ کی تحویل: ٹویٹوں میں مشترک ٹاکسٹ مسابقه کا اثر ہے ایک تحویل یادگار موڈل ہے جو استاندارڈ لکسیون کے متعلق استاندارڈ لکسیون کے متعلق لکھا جاتا ہے اور کلمات انڈیڈنگ فوائل ہم نے طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے جنگل، گرڈینٹ کے درختوں اور لینیاری نمڈلوں کے مطابق طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح ہم نے سیسٹم کی آئٹسٹ 1 (احساسات تنزیت کی پیش بینی) کے لئے، 2 (احساسات عادت کی کلاسیفوں), 3 (والینس تنزیت کی تنزیت) اور 4 (والینس اورالٹ کلاسیفوں) کو انگلیسی ٹویٹ کے لئے پیش کیا۔ ہم نے 25th, 19th, 24th and 15th in the respective four subtasks. بنیس لین کا خیال کیا گیا تھا کہ لکسیکن پر لینیر کرنل کے ساتھ ایک SVM (ویکتور ماشینوں کی حمایت) موڈل تھا اور بنیادی بنیادی ویکتوروں کے متعلق ویکتوروں کے متعلق. ہمارے سیستم کی آخری عملکرد پیرسون میں اندازہ کیا گیا تھا کہ بیس لین کو 2.2% سے 14.6% تک تمام کاموں میں زیادہ عملہ کیا گیا۔', 'vi': 'Sự đệ trình của chúng ta cho nhiệm vụ hoàn hảo Semkhai-thẩm 8: Giá trị trong cuộc thi công việc chia sẻ của Tweet là một mô hình học được giám sát nhờ vào tính năng ngôn ngữ tiêu chuẩn kết hợp với các tính năng cài ghép từ. Chúng tôi sử dụng một kết hợp của nhiều mẫu khác nhau, bao gồm những khu rừng ngẫu nhiên, các cây có dốc lớn, và các mô hình tuyến, sửa sai cho các trường huấn luyện. Chúng tôi đã gửi kết xuất của hệ thống cho phần phụ đề 1 (khả năng dự đoán nồng độ cảm xúc) 2 (phân loại biểu đồ phân loại động cảm xúc) 3 (giai đoạn hồi phục độ huy động) và 4 (phân loại điều chỉnh độ quan trọng) cho tweet của Anh. Chúng tôi đặt 25th, 18th, 24th và 15. Cơ sở cơ bản được xem là một mô hình SVM (Máy móc Vecher hỗ trợ) với hạt nhân tuyến trên tính năng từ ngữ và nhúng dựa vào. Hệ thống cuối cùng của chúng tôi được đo bằng tụ điểm tương quan Pearson đã hoàn thành hoàn to àn vượt mức cơ s ở với một khoảng 2.2+ tới 14.6+ trong tất cả các nhiệm vụ.', 'uz': "SemEval-2018 Vazifalar bilan birlashtirilgan qanday rivojlanishimiz: Twitterda qanday qilingan muammolar, standard leksika xususiyatlariga ishlatadigan o'rganish modeli. Biz har xil modellardan foydalanamiz, shaxsiy daraxtlar, gradient qo'yilgan daraxtlar, va liner modellari, taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi o'zgarishga toʻgʻrilgan. Biz tizimning tashkilotlarini 1 (hissiyotning qismi hisoblanishi darajasi), 2 (hissiyotning oddiy darajasi), 3 (taxminan katta tahrirlash) va 4 (oddiy darajasiga qarshi) va ingliz tweeti uchun. Biz har to'rt vazifalarda 25, 19, 24 va 15 marta boshqa vazifani boshqardik. Name Biz tizimmizning oxirgi jarayonni Pearson bog'liq qiymatlarida o'zgartirdi hamma vazifalar bilan 2.2% dan 14.6% dan foydalanadi.", 'nl': 'Onze inzending aan de SemEval-2018 Task1: Effect in Tweets shared task competitie is een begeleid leermodel dat gebaseerd is op standaard lexicon functies gekoppeld aan woordinbedding functies. We gebruikten een ensemble van diverse modellen, waaronder random forests, gradient boosted trees en lineaire modellen, gecorrigeerd voor training-ontwikkeling set mismatch. We hebben de output van het systeem ingediend voor subtaken 1 (voorspelling van emotie intensiteit), 2 (classificatie van emotie ordinaal), 3 (regressie van valentie intensiteit) en 4 (classificatie van valentie ordinaal), voor Engelse tweets. We plaatsten respectievelijk 25e, 19e, 24e en 15e in de vier subtaken. De onderzochte baseline was een SVM (Support Vector Machines) model met lineaire kernel op het lexicon en op embedden gebaseerde functies. De uiteindelijke prestaties van ons systeem gemeten in Pearson correlatiescores overtroffen de baseline met een marge van 2,2% tot 14,6% voor alle taken.', 'da': 'Vores indsendelse til konkurrencen SemEval-2018 Opgave1: Påvirkning i tweets delte opgaver er en overvåget læringsmodel, der bygger på standard leksikonfunktioner kombineret med ordindlejringsfunktioner. Vi brugte et ensemble af forskellige modeller, herunder tilfældige skove, gradient boostede træer og lineære modeller, korrigeret for træning-udvikling sæt mismatch. Vi indsendte systemets output for underopgaver 1 (følelsesintensitetsforudsigelse), 2 (følelsesordinal klassificering), 3 (valensintensitetsregression) og 4 (valensordinal klassificering), for engelske tweets. Vi placerede 25., 19., 24. og 15. i henholdsvis de fire underopgaver. Den grundlæggende linje, der blev betragtet, var en SVM (Support Vector Machines) model med lineær kerne på leksikonet og integrering baserede funktioner. Vores systems endelige ydeevne målt i Pearson korrelationsscorer oversteg baseline med en margin på 2,2% til 14,6% på tværs af alle opgaver.', 'hr': 'Naše podnošenje na zadatak polovine Evala-2018-1: utjecaj na konkurenciju zajedničkog zadataka Tweets je nadzorni model učenja koji se oslanja na standardne leksičke funkcije povezane s karakteristikama uključujući riječi. Koristili smo kompleks različitih modela, uključujući nasumične šume, povećane drveće i linearne modele, ispravljene za nesporazum u razvoju treninga. Predložili smo rezultat sustava za podatke 1 (predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete), 2 (klasifikacija emocija, 3 (regresija valencijske intenzitete) i 4 (klasifikacija odgovarajućih organa), za engleske tweets. Stavili smo 25., 19., 24. i 15. u četiri podatke. Početna linija smatrala je model SVM (podrška vektorskih strojeva) s linearnim zrelom na leksikonu i ugrađenim funkcijama. Posljednji rezultat našeg sustava mjeren u rezultatima korelacije Pearson a iznosio je početnu liniju sa marginom od 2,2% do 14,6% u svim zadatkima.', 'de': 'Unser Beitrag zum SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets Shared Task Competition ist ein überwachtes Lernmodell, das auf Standard-Lexikon-Funktionen in Verbindung mit Wort-Einbettungsfunktionen basiert. Wir verwendeten ein Ensemble verschiedener Modelle, einschließlich zufälliger Wälder, gradientengestärkter Bäume und linearer Modelle, korrigiert um Trainings-Entwicklungs-Set-Mismatch. Wir haben die Ausgabe des Systems für Teilaufgaben 1 (Vorhersage der Emotionsintensität), 2 (Klassifikation der Emotionsordination), 3 (Regression der Valenzintensität) und 4 (Klassifikation der Valenzintensität) für englische Tweets eingereicht. Wir platzierten 25th, 19th, 24th und 15th in den vier Teilaufgaben. Als Ausgangsbasis wurde ein SVM-Modell (Support Vector Machines) mit linearem Kernel auf dem Lexikon und eingebetteten Funktionen betrachtet. Die endgültige Leistung unseres Systems, gemessen in Pearson-Korrelationswerten, übertraf die Basislinie um eine Marge von 2,2% bis 14,6% bei allen Aufgaben.', 'id': 'Submission kami ke SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets shared task competition is a supervised learning model relying on standard lexicon features coupled with word embedding features. Kami menggunakan sebuah kumpulan model berbeda, termasuk hutan acak, pohon yang didorong gradien, dan model linear, diperbaiki untuk set pelatihan-pembangunan tidak cocok. Kami mengirimkan output sistem untuk subtasks 1 (prediksi intensitas emosi), 2 (klasifikasi ordinal emosi), 3 (regresi intensitas valensi) dan 4 (klasifikasi ordinal valensi), untuk tweet Inggris. Kami menempatkan 25, 19, 24 dan 15 dalam empat subtasks. Base yang dipertimbangkan adalah model SVM (Support Vector Machines) dengan kernel linear pada leksikon dan karakteristik berdasarkan embedding. Performasi akhir sistem kita diukur dalam skor korelasi Pearson melebihi dasar dengan margin 2,2% hingga 14,6% di seluruh tugas.', 'ko': '우리는SemEval-18퀘스트1에 제출했다. 트위터 공유 퀘스트 경쟁에서의 영향은 표준 어휘 특징과 단어 삽입 특징을 바탕으로 하는 감독 학습 모델이다.우리는 무작위 삼림, 사다리꼴 증강수와 선형 모델을 포함한 서로 다른 모델을 사용했고 훈련-발전집이 일치하지 않는 것을 교정했다.우리는 영어 추문을 위해 하위 임무 1(정서 강도 예측), 2(정서 순서 분류), 3(배가 강도 회귀)와 4(배가 순서 분류)의 시스템 출력을 제출했다.우리는 네 개의 하위 임무 중에서 각각 25, 19, 24, 15위에 랭크되어 있다.고려된 베이스라인은 사전 기반의 선형 코어와 포함된 피쳐 기반의 지원 벡터 머신(SVM) 모델입니다.모든 임무에서 우리 시스템의 최종 성능(필슨 관련 점수로 평가)은 모두 기선의 2.2%에서 14.6%보다 우수하다.', 'bg': 'Нашето представяне в конкурса за споделена задача е модел на обучение под надзор, базиран на стандартни лексиконови функции, съчетани с функции за вграждане на думи. Използвахме ансамбъл от разнообразни модели, включително произволни гори, наклонени дървета и линейни модели, коригирани за несъответствие на тренировъчно-развойния набор. Изпратихме изхода на системата за подзадачи 1 (прогнозиране на интензивността на емоцията), 2 (класификация на ординалната емоция), 3 (регресия на интензивността на валентността) и 4 (класификация на ординалната валентност), за английски туитове. Поставихме съответно 25, 19, 24 и 15 в четирите подзадачи. Разгледаната базова база е SVM (Support Vector Machines) модел с линейно ядро на лексикона и вградени функции. Крайното представяне на нашата система, измерено в корелационните оценки на Пиърсън, надмина базовата база с марж от 2,2% до 14,6% при всички задачи.', 'sw': 'Tamko letu la SemEval-2018 Tamko 1: Tofauti katika twita zilizoshirikiana na kazi hiyo ni modeli ya kujifunza inayotegemea vipengele vya lexico vya kawaida vinavyohusiana na ujumbe wa maneno. Tulitumia mfano wa mifano mbalimbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na misitu isiyo na urahisi, miti yenye rangi, na mifano ya mistari, iliyoharibiwa kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya mafunzo. Tulifanya matokeo ya mfumo kwa ajili ya kazi za chini 1 (utabiri wa hisia kwa kiwango kikubwa), 2 (utabiri wa tabia za kawaida), 3 (vikwazo vikali vya upinzani) na 4 (usawa wa usawa wa kawaida), kwa twiti za Kiingereza. Tulifanya kazi hizo za 25, 19, 24 na 15 kwa kiwango cha 15. Mtandao wa msingi uliopitiliwa kuwa ni modeli ya SVM (Mashine ya Kuunga mkono Vector) yenye vifaa vya taratibu vya msingi kwenye lexico na vipengele vilivyotumika. Maelezo ya mwisho ya mfumo wetu yalipima katika vipindi vya mahusiano vya Pearson yalivyofanyika msingi kwa kiwango cha asilimia 2.2 hadi asilimia 14.6 katika kazi zote.', 'fa': 'تسلیم ما به مسابقه نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸: اثر در مسابقه کار مشترک تویتها یک مدل یادگیری تحت نظر است که بر ویژه\u200cهای استاندارد لکسیون متعلق به ویژه\u200cهای مشترک کلمه است. ما از یک جمله از مدل های مختلف استفاده کردیم، شامل جنگل های تصادفی، درختان افزایش گرادیان، و مدل های خطی، برای تغییر تغییر آموزش و توسعه را درست کردیم. ما نتیجه سیستم را برای آینده\u200cهای ۱ (پیش\u200cبینی شدت احساسات) برای توئیت\u200cهای انگلیسی فرستادیم. ما 25م، 19م، 24م و 15م را در چهار زیربازی قرار دادیم. این خط بنیادی که به نظر می\u200cرسید یک مدل SVM (پشتیبانی ماشین\u200cهای ویکتور) بود که با کرن خط روی کلکسیون و ویژگی\u200cهای بنیادی دارد. اجرای نهایی سیستم ما در امتیاز ارتباط پیرسون با مرز ۲.۲% تا ۱۴.۶% در تمام کارها بیشتر از آن انجام داده است.', 'tr': "Biziň SemEval-2018 Taýýarlarymyza görkezilişimiz 1: Tweets aralygynda etkileşin täzelikleri ýagdaýynda üýtgeýän öwrenme nusgasy diýip durýan standart leksiýanyň özellikleri bilen birleştirilýär. Biz dürli nusgalary ulandyk, göwnüş tokaýlar, agaçlary we çyzgyly nusgalary we ösümli nusgalary üçin düzeldi. Biz sistemiň çizgisini 1-nji (duýgym gödeksi döwürlemek üçin), 2-nji (duýgym gödeksi döwürlemek üçin), 3-nji (güýçli regressiýa) we 4-nji (güýçli döwürlemek üçin), iňlisçe tweets üçin tabşyrdyk. Biz 25-nji, 19-nji, 24-nji we 15-nji diýip dört subtaklara goýdyk. Meýdança çizgi bir SVM (Vektor makineleri Destekleýän) nusgasy leksikon üstünde çizgi kernel we daşartmak üçin bir nusgasy boldy. Sistemimiziň iň soňky şekilde Pearson'a ölçülen çykyşlygymyz 2.2% we 14.6% tarapyndan başga çykyşlygyny çykardy.", 'sq': 'Përdorimi ynë në Detyrën SemEval-2018: Ne përdorëm një grup modelesh të ndryshme, duke përfshirë pyje të rastësishme, pemë të nxitura me gradient ë dhe modele lineare, të korrigjuara për mospërputhjen e grupit trajnimi-zhvillim. Ne paraqitëm daljen e sistemit për nënkërkesat 1 (parashikimi i intensitetit të emocioneve), 2 (klasifikimi ordinal i emocioneve), 3 (regresioni i intensitetit të valencës) dhe 4 (klasifikimi ordinal i valencës), për tweetet angleze. Ne vendosëm 25, 19, 24 dhe 15 në katër nënpyetje respektivisht. Baza e konsideruar ishte një model SVM (Support Vector Machines) me bërthamë lineare në lexikon dhe karakteristika bazuar në përfshirje. Performanca përfundimtare e sistemit tonë e matur në rezultatet e korrelacionit të Pearsonit kaloi bazën me një marxh prej 2.2% deri në 14.6% në të gjitha detyrat.', 'af': "Ons onderwerp aan die SemEval-2018 Taak1: Afteken in Tweets gedeelde taak samekoms is 'n onderwerp onderwerp model wat vertrou op standaard lexikon funksies wat saam met woord inbetering funksies gekoppel is. Ons het 'n ensemble van verskeie modele gebruik, insluitend willekeurige bose, Gradiënte vergroot bome en lineêre modele, korrigeer vir ontwikkeling-ontwikkeling stel nie ooreenkomstig nie. Ons het die stelsel se uitvoer voorgestuur vir subtaske 1 (emosie intensiteit voorskou), 2 (emosie ordeel klasifikasie), 3 (valensiteit intensiteit regresie) en 4 (valensiteit ordeel klasifikasie), vir Engelske tweete. Ons het 25de, 19de, 24de en 15de in die vier subtaske respektief gesit. Name Ons stelsel se eindelike prestasie gemeet in Pearson-korrelasie-punte het die basisline uitgevoer deur 'n marjin van 2.2% tot 14.6% oor alle opdragte.", 'am': 'የሳምEval-2018 ስክስ1 አቀናመጥ፤ በTweets ትዊተር ተቃውሞ የተሰራጨ ትምህርት ሞዴል በንግግር በተደጋገመ ቃላት ላይ የሚታመን የሌክሲኮን ምርጫዎች ላይ የሚደገፍ ተማሪ ነው፡፡ ለትምህርት ትምህርት ማቀናቀል የተደረገውን የልዩ ዓይነት ምሳሌ፣ የዱር፣ ቀዳሚ የበረታች ዛፎች እና የመስመር ዓይነቶች እና ምሳሌ አቀረብን፡፡ የስብተሩን ውጤት ለመስኮቶች 1 (የስብሰባ ኃይለኛ ትንቢት)፣ 2 (የኢንተርናዊ ክፍል)፣ 3 (የድጋፍ ግጭት ክፍተት) እና 4 (የተቀናቀል ትዊተሮች) አቀረብን፡፡ በአራቱ ደብዳቤዎች ውስጥ 25፣ 19፣ 24th እና 15ኛ አደረግን። የመደቡን መስመር የSVM (የጨዋታው vector machines) ሞዴል በሊክሲኮን እና በክፍለ ምርጫዎች ላይ የlinear kernel ነው፡፡ የፍጻሜው የስርዓታችን የፍጻሜው የፊርሶን ግንኙነት አካባቢ ሁኔታ በሥርዓት ሁሉ ላይ 2.2 በመቶ እስከ 14.6 በመቶ ክፈት ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մեր ներկայացումը ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի հանձնարարության1. Անխուժումը Թվիթերի ընդհանուր հանձնարարությունների մրցակցությունը վերահսկված ուսուցման մոդել է, որը հիմնված է ստանդարտ լեքսիկոնի հատկությունների վրա, որոնք միավորված են բառերի Մենք օգտագործեցինք բազմազան մոդելներ, ներառյալ պատահական անտառներ, աճեցված ծառեր և գծային մոդելներ, որոնք կարգավորվել էին մարզի-զարգացման համար: Մենք ներկայացրեցինք համակարգի արդյունքը 1 (էմոցիոնալ ինտենսիվության կանխատեսումը), 2 (էմոցիոնալ կարգավորումը), 3 (վալենսիոնալ ինտենսիվության ռեգրեսիան) և 4 (վալենսիոնալ կարգավորումը) անգլերեն թվիթերի համար: Մենք տեղադրեցինք 25-ին, 19-ին, 24-ին և 15-ին 4 ենթահարցերում: Հիմնական հիմքն այն էր, որ համարվում էր Վեկտորի աջակցության մեխանիզմների մոդել, որը գծային միջուկը ունի լեքսիկոնի վրա և ներգրավված առանձնահատկություններ: Մեր համակարգի վերջնական արտադրողականությունը, չափված Պիրսոնի կորելացիայի արդյունքներով, գերազանցեց սկզբնական արժեքը 2.2-14.6 տոկոսով բոլոր խնդիրների ընթացքում:', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের প্রতি আমাদের জরুরি: টুইটারে প্রভাব ফেলেছে টুইটারের কাজের প্রতিযোগিতা হচ্ছে স্ট্যান্ডার্ড লেক্সিকোর বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির আমরা বিভিন্ন ধরনের মডেল ব্যবহার করেছিলাম, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে অদ্ভুত বন, গ্রেডিয়ান বাড়িয়েছে গাছ এবং লাইনিয়ার মডেল, প্রশিক্ষণ-উন্ন আমরা সাবট্যাক্সের জন্য সিস্টেমের আউটপুট জমা দিয়েছি ১ (আবেগের গভীর ভবিষ্যৎবাণী), ২ (অনুভূতির সাধারণ বিভাগ), ৩ (ভ্যালেন্সের শক্তি পুনরায় দমন)  আমরা শুধুমাত্র ২৫, ১৯, ২৪ এবং ১৫ নাম্বার চারটি সাবটাকাজে রেখেছি। বেসেলাইন বিবেচনা করা হচ্ছে একটি SVM (সমর্থন করে ভেক্টর মেশিন) মডেল, যার সাথে লেক্সিকোরে লাইনার কেনেল এবং ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্ পিয়ারসনের সম্পর্ক স্কোরে আমাদের সিস্টেমের শেষ প্রদর্শনীর পরিমাপ পরিমাপ করা হয়েছে যা সকল কাজের মধ্যে ২. ২% থেকে ১৪.', 'az': "SemEval-2018 Task1'ə təsdiqlənmək: Tweets paylaşılan işlər müharibəsində müxtəlif bir öyrənmə modeli standart leksikon özelliklərinə güvən edir. Biz müxtəlif modellərlə birlikdə müxtəlif ormanlar, gradient artırılmış ağaclar və linear modellərdən istifadə etdik, təhsil-təhsil təhsil edilməsi üçün düzəldilmiş. Biz sistemin çıxışını 1 (emosyon şiddəti öngörünür), 2 (emosyon düzgün klasifikasyonu), 3 (valence intensity regressioni) və 4 (valence ordinal klasifikasyonu) İngilizci tweets üçün təbliğ etdik. Biz 25-ci, 19-ci, 24-ci və 15-ci ilə dörd subtasklarda yerləşdirdik. Əsas səhifələri leksikon üstündə çizgi kernel olan SVM (Vektor Makinelərini Desteklə) modeli idi. Sistemimizin son performansı Pearson'da ölçülmüş correlasyon nöqtələri bütün işlər boyunca 2.2%-dən 14.6%-dən uzaqlaşdı.", 'ca': "La nostra presentació a la tasca SemEval-2018: We used an ensemble of diverse models, including random forests, gradient boosted trees, and linear models, corrected for training-development set mismatch.  Vam presentar la producció del sistema per les subtaskes 1 (predicció de l'intensitat emocional), 2 (classificació ordinal emocional), 3 (regressió de l'intensitat de valencia) i 4 (classificació ordinal de valencia), per als tweets anglesos. Vam posar el 25è, el 19è, el 24è i el 15è en les quatre subtaskes respectivament. La base considerada va ser un model SVM (Support Vector Machines) amb núcles linears al lèxic i característiques basades en l'incorporació. El rendiment final del nostre sistema mesurat en puntuacions de correlació de Pearson va superar la base d'un marge de 2,2% a 14,6% en totes les tasques.", 'et': 'Meie esitamine SemEval-2018 Ülesande1: mõju tweets jagatud ülesannete konkursile on juhendatud õppemudel, mis põhineb standardsetel leksikoni funktsioonidel koos sõna manustamise funktsioonidega. Kasutasime erinevate mudelite ansamblit, sealhulgas juhuslikud metsad, gradient-võimendatud puud ja lineaarsed mudelid, mida parandati treeningu-arenduskomplekti ebakõla suhtes. Esitasime süsteemi väljundid alaülesannete 1 (emotsioonide intensiivsuse prognoosimine), 2 (emotsioonide ordinaalse klassifikatsiooni), 3 (valentside intensiivsuse regressiooni) ja 4 (valentside ordinaalse klassifikatsiooni) jaoks inglise keeles. Nelja alamülesande hulka panime vastavalt 25., 19., 24. ja 15. koha. Lähtealuseks oli SVM (Support Vector Machines) mudel, millel oli lineaarne kernel leksikonil ja manustamisel põhinevad funktsioonid. Meie süsteemi lõplik jõudlus, mida mõõdeti Pearsoni korrelatsiooni skoorides, ületas algväärtust 2,2% kuni 14,6% kõigis ülesannetes.', 'bs': 'Naše podnošenje na zadatak semiEval-2018-1: utjecaj na konkurenciju zajedničkih zadataka Tweets je nadzorni model učenja koji se oslanja na standardne leksičke funkcije povezane s karakteristikama uključenih riječima. Koristili smo kompleks različitih modela, uključujući nasumične šume, povećane drveće, i linearne modele, ispravljene za nesporazum u razvoju treninga. Predložili smo rezultat sustava za podatke 1 (predviđanje emocionalne intenzitete), 2 (klasifikacija emocija, 3 (regresija valencijske intenzitete) i 4 (klasifikacija odgovarajuće pravila), za engleske tweets. Stavili smo 25., 19., 24. i 15. u četiri podkaze. Početna linija je smatrala model SVM (podrška vektorskim mašinama) s linearnim kernel na leksikonu i ugrađenim funkcijama. Posljednji rezultat našeg sistema mjeren u Pearsonovoj korelaciji je iznosio početnu liniju s a marginom od 2,2% do 14,6% u svim zadatkima.', 'cs': 'Náš předložený do soutěže SemEval-2018 Task1: Affect in Tweets shared task soutěže je model supervizovaného učení spoléhající na standardní slovní funkce spojené s funkcemi vložení slov. Použili jsme soubor různých modelů, včetně náhodných lesů, stromů posílených gradientem a lineárních modelů, opravených kvůli nesouladu tréninkových a vývojových sad. Pro anglické tweety jsme odeslali výstup systému pro dílčí úkoly 1 (predikce intenzity emocí), 2 (klasifikace emocí ordinální), 3 (regrese intenzity valence) a 4 (klasifikace valence ordinální). Ve čtyřech dílčích úkolech jsme umístili 25th, 19th, 24th a 15th. Zvažovaným základním bodem byl SVM (Support Vector Machines) model s lineárním jádrem na lexikonu a vlastnostmi založenými na vložení. Konečný výkon našeho systému měřený v Pearsonových korelačních skórích předčil základní hodnotu o rozpětí 2,2% až 14,6% u všech úkolů.', 'fi': 'Tekstimme SemEval-2018 Task 1: Affect in Tweets shared task -kilpailuun on ohjattu oppimismalli, joka perustuu vakiosanaston ominaisuuksiin ja sanan upotusominaisuuksiin. Käytimme monimuotoisia malleja, kuten satunnaismetsiä, kaltevuuspohjaisia puita ja lineaarisia malleja, jotka korjattiin harjoitus- ja kehitystasojen yhteensopimattomuuden perusteella. Lähetimme järjestelmän tuotokset englanninkielisille tweeteille alatehtäville 1 (emotion intensity prediction), 2 (emotion ordinal classification), 3 (valence intensity regression) ja 4 (valence ordinal classification). Sijoitimme neljässä alatehtävässä 25., 19., 24. ja 15. sijalle. Lähtökohtana tarkasteltiin SVM (Support Vector Machines) -mallia, jossa oli lineaarinen ydin sanastossa ja upotuspohjaisia ominaisuuksia. Pearsonin korrelaatiopisteillä mitattu järjestelmämme lopullinen suorituskyky ylitti lähtötilanteen 2,2–14,6% marginaalilla kaikissa tehtävissä.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe Ketoken to the semiinval-2020 task 1: AfEffectt in Tuts share task contest 2,2 Awak dhéwé ngewat perintah sistem kanggo supoyo 1 Awak dhéwé wis nambah pukpuku-puku, 19, 24th lan kenal-puku kanggo nganggo dolanan cara peter. Name Sistem sakjane nggawe barang nggawe geraraning nggawe gerangdol perusahaan sing nggawe barang nggawe barang 2.2% sampek 14.6% sak cara nggawe', 'ha': "Azamarmu zuwa the Semeval-2018 Task1: Effect in Twitter-share competitin aikin is a watching motel of learning relaxing on wasu fassarar leksikon na daidaita da word-embedding feature. Ba mu yi amfani da wani misãlai masu motsi daban-daban, kamar misogi da aka buɗe shi, mai sauri na itãce, da misalin linje, an daidaita wa masu motsi da za'a daidaita. Mun saka ƙaramar shirin na'ura wa subaikin 1 (hisani mai ƙaranci), 2 (mai hisani da kwamfyutan kawaici), 3 (mai girgiza na girgije na fancy) da 4 (sifilaɗar fanel mai kawaici), wa-Twitter na Ingiriya. Kuma Muka sanya aikin huɗu a cikin ƙayyade 25, 19th, 24 da 15. An ƙayyade salon da aka ƙayyade shi wata motel na SvM (Mataimakin Mataimakin na Taimako) mai karya kernel na tsaye kan leksin da aka shigar da shi. Ganin kammala na'urarmu ya ƙayyade cikin shirin Pearson na ƙarami ya sami fassarar 2.2 zuwa 14.6 a kowace aikin duk.", 'he': 'ההעברה שלנו למשימה SemEval-2018: השתמשנו במסגרת של דוגמנים מגוונים, כולל יערות אקראיות, עצים מעודדים, ודוגמנים לינריים, תוקנים עבור התאמה-פיתוח קבוצת אי התאמה. הגענו את יציאה של המערכת לתת השאלות 1 (צפייה של אינטנסיבות רגשית), 2 (מסווג רגשי אורגני), 3 (חזרה של אינטנסיבות ואלנסיות) ו-4 (מסווג אורגני ואלנסיות), לטוויטים אנגליים. שמנו את ה-25, ה-19, ה-24, ו-15 בארבע התשובות, בהתאם. הבסיס הנחשב היה מודל SVM (מכונות ויקטורים תמיכה) עם גרעין לינרית על הלקסיקון והתכונות המבוססים. ההופעה הסופית של המערכת שלנו, המדודה בתוצאות הקרילאציה של פירסון, עברה את הבסיס על ידי שווה של 2.2% עד 14.6% בכל המשימות.', 'sk': 'Naša predložitev na tekmovanju skupnih nalog SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Vpliv v tweets je model nadzorovanega učenja, ki temelji na standardnih funkcijah leksikona v kombinaciji s funkcijami vključevanja besed. Uporabili smo ansambel različnih modelov, vključno z naključnimi gozdovi, drevesi, povečanimi z naklonom in linearnimi modeli, popravljenimi glede na neskladje treningov-razvoja nabora. Izhod sistema smo predložili za podnaloge 1 (napoved intenzivnosti čustev), 2 (klasifikacija čustev ordinacije), 3 (regresija intenzivnosti valence) in 4 (klasifikacija valence ordinacije), za angleške tweete. V štirih podnalogah smo uvrstili 25., 19., 24. in 15. mesto. Obravnavana osnovna izhodišča je bila model SVM (Support Vector Machines) z linearnim jedrom na leksikonu in funkcijami, ki temeljijo na vdelavi. Končna uspešnost našega sistema, merjena v Pearsonovih korelacijskih rezultatih, je presegla izhodiščno vrednost za 2,2% do 14,6% pri vseh opravilih.', 'bo': "ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་SemEval-2018 Task1: We used an ensemble of various models, including random forests, gradient boosted trees, and linear models, corrected for training-development set mismatch. We submitted the system's output for subtasks 1 (emotion intensity prediction), 2 (emotion ordinal classification), 3 (valence intensity regression) and 4 (valence ordinal classification), for English tweets. ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་ལྡན་སའི་རྒྱབ་ལྗང་ཆེན་25དང་། 19དང་། 24དང་། 15འི་ནང་དུ་བཅུག་པ་འདུག The baseline considered was an SVM (Support Vector Machines) model with linear kernel on the lexicon and embedding based features. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག"}
{'en': 'KU-MTL at SemEval-2018 Task 1 : Multi-task Identification of Affect in Tweets', 'ar': 'KU-MTL في SemEval-2018 المهمة 1: تحديد متعدد المهام للتأثير في التغريدات', 'pt': 'KU-MTL na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 1: Identificação multitarefa de afeto em tweets', 'es': 'KU-MTL en la Tarea 1 de Semeval-2018: Identificación multitarea del afecto en los tuits', 'fr': "KU-MTL au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 1\xa0: identification multitâche de l'affect dans les tweets", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のKU - MTLタスク1 ：ツイートの影響のマルチタスク識別', 'zh': 'KU-MTLĺś¨SemEval-2018ĺŠˇ1:ćŽ¨ć–‡ĺ¤šä»»ĺŠˇčŻ†', 'hi': 'KU-MTL पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 1: बहु-कार्य Tweets में प्रभाव की पहचान', 'ru': 'KU-MTL на SemEval-2018 Задача 1: Многозадачная идентификация влияния в твитах', 'ga': 'KU-MTL ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 1: Ilthasc a Aithint Tionchair in Tweets', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'KU-MTL a SemEval-2018 1. feladat: Az érintettség többfeladatos azonosítása tweetekben', 'el': 'Καθήκον 1: Προσδιορισμός Επιπτώσεων σε Τουίτετ πολλαπλών εργασιών', 'kk': 'KU- MTL жарым- 2018 тапсырманың 1- тапсырмасы: Твиттерде бірнеше тапсырмаларды анықтау', 'it': "KU-MTL a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Identificazione multi-task dell'impatto nei tweet", 'mk': 'KU-MTL на SemEval-2018 задача 1: Повеќезадачна идентификација на влијанието на твитовите', 'lt': 'KU-MTL puslapyje 2018 m. 1 užduotis: Daugiauždavinių poveikio nustatymas Tweetuose', 'ms': 'KU-MTL di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Pengenalan Kesukaan Berberbilang-Tugas dalam Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 1- ല്\u200d കെ- എംടിഎല്\u200d: ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പ്രഭാവിയുടെ പല- ജോലി തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mt': 'KU-MTL f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 1: Identifikazzjoni ta’ Impatt Multikompitu fit-Tweets', 'mn': 'KU-MTL at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Multi-task Identification of Effects in Tweets', 'no': 'KU-MTL ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 1: Multi task Identification of Effect in Tweets', 'pl': 'KU-MTL na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 1: Wielozadaniowa identyfikacja efektu w tweetach', 'sr': 'KU-MTL na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Multi task Identification of Effects in Tweets', 'ro': 'KU-MTL la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 1: Identificarea mai multor sarcini a afectului în tweets', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'KU-MTL at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Identification of Affect in Tweets', 'sv': 'KU-MTL på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 1: Identifiering av påverkan i tweets med flera uppgifter', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் KU- MTL', 'ur': 'KU-MTL نصف-2018 ٹاکس ۱: ٹویٹوں میں بہت سی ٹاکس کی اثرات شناسایی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KU-MTV ở SemEvl-208 Task 1: phát biểu tác dụng đa nhiệm vụ nhận diện trong Tweet', 'hr': 'KU-MTL na semiEval-2018 zadatku 1: Multi task Identification of Effects in Tweets', 'nl': 'KU-MTL op SemEval-2018 Taak 1: Multi-task Identificatie van Affect in Tweets', 'da': 'KU-MTL på SemEval-2018 Opgave 1: Identifikation af påvirkning i tweets med flere opgaver', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Идентифициране на въздействието в туитове с множество задачи', 'ko': 'KU-MTL이 SemEval-18 작업 1: 다중 작업 식별 트위터의 영향', 'id': 'KU-MTL di SemEval-2018 Tugas 1: Identifikasi Multi-Tugas Affect dalam Tweets', 'de': 'KU-MTL bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 1: Multi-Task Identifikation von Affekten in Tweets', 'sw': 'KU-MTL kwenye SemEval-2018 Kazi 1: Utambulishaji wa Kazi nyingi kwa Tafsiri katika Twita', 'fa': 'KU-MTL در پایین Eval-2018 Task 1: شناسایی چندین تاثیر در Tweets', 'tr': 'KU-MTL at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Multi-task Identification of Affect in Tweets', 'af': 'KU- MTL by SemEval- 2018 Taak 1: Multi- task Identification of Effects in Tweets', 'sq': 'KU-MTL at SemEval-2018 Task 1: Multi-task Identification of Affect in Tweets', 'am': 'KU-MTL at SemEval-2018 ስራ 1: Multi-task Identification of Affect in Tweets', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'KU-MTL na semiEval-2018 Task 1: Multi task Identification of Effects in Tweets', 'az': 'KU-MTL at semiEval-2018 Task 1: Multi-task Identification of Effects in Tweets', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১-এ কে- এমটিএল: টুইটে প্রভাবের বহুবার পরিচিতি', 'cs': 'KU-MTL na SemEval-2018 Úkol 1: Multiúkolová identifikace efektu ve tweetech', 'ca': 'KU-MTL a SemEval-2018 Task 1: Multi-task Identification of Affect in Tweets', 'et': 'KU-MTL SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 1: Mitme ülesandega mõju tuvastamine tweetides', 'fi': 'KU-MTL SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 1: Vaikutuksen monitehtävä twiitteissä', 'jv': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'sk': 'KU-MTL na SemEval-2018 Naloga 1: Večopravilna identifikacija vpliva v tweetih', 'he': 'KU-MTL ב SemEval-2018 משימה 1: זיהוי משימות רבות של השפעה בטוויטס', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'KU-MTL ལྕགས་ཅན་གྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་-2018 Task 1:Multi-task Identification of Affect in Tweets'}
{'en': 'We take a multi-task learning approach to the shared Task 1 at SemEval-2018. The general idea concerning the model structure is to use as little external data as possible in order to preserve the task relatedness and reduce complexity. We employ multi-task learning with hard parameter sharing to exploit the relatedness between sub-tasks. As a base model, we use a standard recurrent neural network for both the classification and regression subtasks. Our system ranks 32nd out of 48 participants with a Pearson score of 0.557 in the first subtask, and 20th out of 35 in the fifth subtask with an accuracy score of 0.464.', 'ar': 'نتبع نهجًا تعليميًا متعدد المهام للمهمة المشتركة 1 في SemEval-2018. الفكرة العامة المتعلقة بهيكل النموذج هي استخدام أقل قدر ممكن من البيانات الخارجية من أجل الحفاظ على ارتباط المهمة وتقليل التعقيد. نحن نستخدم التعلم متعدد المهام مع مشاركة المعلمات الصعبة لاستغلال الارتباط بين المهام الفرعية. كنموذج أساسي ، نستخدم شبكة عصبية متكررة قياسية لكل من المهام الفرعية للتصنيف والانحدار. يصنف نظامنا المرتبة 32 من أصل 48 مشاركًا بدرجة بيرسون 0.557 في المهمة الفرعية الأولى ، و 20 من 35 في المهمة الفرعية الخامسة بدرجة دقة تبلغ 0.464.', 'es': 'Adoptamos un enfoque de aprendizaje multitarea para la Tarea 1 compartida en SemEval-2018. La idea general con respecto a la estructura del modelo es utilizar la menor cantidad posible de datos externos para preservar la relación entre tareas y reducir la complejidad. Empleamos el aprendizaje multitarea con un duro intercambio de parámetros para aprovechar la relación entre las subtareas. Como modelo base, utilizamos una red neuronal recurrente estándar para las subtareas de clasificación y regresión. Nuestro sistema ocupa el puesto 32 de 48 participantes con una puntuación de Pearson de 0.557 en la primera subtarea y el 20 de 35 en la quinta subtarea con una puntuación de precisión de 0.464.', 'pt': 'Adotamos uma abordagem de aprendizado multitarefa para a Tarefa 1 compartilhada no SemEval-2018. A ideia geral sobre a estrutura do modelo é usar o mínimo de dados externos possível para preservar o relacionamento das tarefas e reduzir a complexidade. Empregamos aprendizado multitarefa com compartilhamento de parâmetros rígidos para explorar o relacionamento entre subtarefas. Como modelo base, usamos uma rede neural recorrente padrão para as subtarefas de classificação e regressão. Nosso sistema ocupa o 32º lugar de 48 participantes com uma pontuação de Pearson de 0,557 na primeira subtarefa e 20º de 35 na quinta subtarefa com uma pontuação de precisão de 0,464.', 'fr': "Nous adoptons une approche d'apprentissage multitâche pour la tâche 1 partagée à SemeVal-2018. L'idée générale concernant la structure du modèle est d'utiliser le moins de données externes possible afin de préserver la relation entre les tâches et de réduire la complexité. Nous utilisons l'apprentissage multitâche avec un partage de paramètres précis pour exploiter la relation entre les sous-tâches. Comme modèle de base, nous utilisons un réseau neuronal récurrent standard pour les sous-tâches de classification et de régression. Notre système se classe 32e sur 48 participants avec un score Pearson de 0,557 pour la première sous-tâche, et 20e sur 35 pour la cinquième sous-tâche avec un score de précision de 0,464.", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018の共有タスク1には、マルチタスク学習アプローチを採用しています。モデル構造に関する一般的な考え方は、タスク関連性を維持し、複雑さを軽減するために、外部データをできるだけ少なく使用することである。サブタスク間の関連性を活用するために、ハードパラメータ共有によるマルチタスク学習を採用しています。ベースモデルとして、分類サブタスクと回帰サブタスクの両方に標準的な再帰ニューラルネットワークを使用します。当社のシステムは、最初のサブタスクでPearsonスコア0.557、5番目のサブタスクで精度スコア0.464で、参加者48人中32位にランクインしています。', 'zh': '吾于SemEval-2018上多任务学以共其1。 凡结构之心,用尽可能少之外数,以守其任相关性而降复杂性。 吾用多任务学与刚参数共用子之相关性。 为本模形,分归子递归神经网络。 臣等统于48名参与者中排名第32位,Pearson于首务之中者分为0.557,在第五子者排名第20位,在35者排名第20位,准确度分为0.464。', 'hi': 'हम SemEval-2018 में साझा कार्य 1 के लिए एक बहु-कार्य सीखने का दृष्टिकोण लेते हैं। मॉडल संरचना से संबंधित सामान्य विचार कार्य संबंधितता को संरक्षित करने और जटिलता को कम करने के लिए यथासंभव कम बाहरी डेटा का उपयोग करना है। हम उप-कार्यों के बीच संबंधितता का फायदा उठाने के लिए हार्ड पैरामीटर साझाकरण के साथ बहु-कार्य सीखने को नियोजित करते हैं। एक आधार मॉडल के रूप में, हम वर्गीकरण और प्रतिगमन उपकार्य दोनों के लिए एक मानक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारा सिस्टम पहले सबटास्क में 0.557 के पियर्सन स्कोर के साथ 48 प्रतिभागियों में से 32 वें स्थान पर है, और 0.464 के सटीकता स्कोर के साथ पांचवें सबटास्क में 35 में से 20 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'Мы используем многозадачный подход к обучению для общей задачи 1 на SemEval-2018. Общая идея, касающаяся структуры модели, заключается в том, чтобы использовать как можно меньше внешних данных для сохранения взаимосвязи задач и снижения сложности. Мы используем многозадачное обучение с распределением жестких параметров, чтобы использовать взаимосвязь между подзадачами. В качестве базовой модели мы используем стандартную рекуррентную нейронную сеть как для подзадач классификации, так и для подзадач регрессии. Наша система занимает 32-е место из 48 участников с оценкой Пирсона 0,557 в первой подзадаче и 20-е место из 35 в пятой подзадаче с оценкой точности 0,464.', 'ga': 'Glacaimid cur chuige foghlama ilthasc i leith Tasc 1 comhroinnte ag SemEval-2018. Is é an smaoineamh ginearálta a bhaineann le struchtúr na samhla ná úsáid a bhaint as a laghad sonraí seachtracha agus is féidir chun an tascghaolmhar a chaomhnú agus chun castacht a laghdú. Bainimid úsáid as foghlaim ilthasc le comhroinnt paraiméadar crua chun an gaol idir fo-thascanna a shaothrú. Mar mhúnla bonn, úsáidimid líonra néarach athfhillteach caighdeánach le haghaidh na bhfothascanna aicmithe agus aischéimnithí araon. Tá ár gcóras sa 32ú háit as 48 rannpháirtí le scór Pearson de 0.557 sa chéad fhothasc, agus 20ú as 35 sa chúigiú fothasc le scór cruinnis de 0.464.', 'el': 'Ακολουθούμε μια προσέγγιση εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών στην κοινή εργασία 1 στο SemEval-2018. Η γενική ιδέα σχετικά με τη δομή του μοντέλου είναι η χρήση όσο το δυνατόν λιγότερων εξωτερικών δεδομένων προκειμένου να διατηρηθεί η συσχέτιση των εργασιών και να μειωθεί η πολυπλοκότητα. Χρησιμοποιούμε εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών με σκληρή κοινή χρήση παραμέτρων για να εκμεταλλευτούμε τη σχέση μεταξύ των επιμέρους εργασιών. Ως βασικό μοντέλο, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα τυπικό επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο τόσο για την ταξινόμηση όσο και για την υποτροπή. Το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται 32ος από τους 48 συμμετέχοντες με βαθμολογία Pearson 0.557 στην πρώτη υποταγή και 20ός από 35 στην πέμπτη υποταγή με βαθμολογία ακρίβειας 0.464.', 'hu': 'A SemEval-2018 során többfeladatos tanulási megközelítést alkalmazunk a megosztott 1. feladathoz. A modell struktúrájával kapcsolatos általános elképzelés a lehető legkevesebb külső adat felhasználása a feladatok összefüggésének megőrzése és a bonyolultság csökkentése érdekében. Többfeladatos tanulást alkalmazunk kemény paraméterek megosztásával, hogy kihasználjuk az alcsoportok közötti kapcsolatot. Alapmodellként egy standard visszatérő neurális hálózatot használunk mind az osztályozási, mind a regressziós részfeladatokhoz. Rendszerünk 48 résztvevő közül 32. helyen áll, az első részfeladatban 0,557 Pearson pontszámmal, az ötödik részfeladatban pedig 35 pontszámmal 20. helyen, 0,464 pontszámmal.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვიყენებთ მრავალ დავასწავლების მიღება საერთო დავალების 1-ში SemEval-2018-ში. მოდელური სტრუქტურაზე საერთო იდეა იყო, რომ გამოყენება ძალიან პატარა გარეშე მონაცემები, რომლებიც შესაძლებელია, რამდენიმე მონაცემების შესახებ და შე ჩვენ მრავალ დავასწავლობთ მრავალ დავასწავლობით ძალიან პარამეტრის გაყოფილი, რომ გამოვიყენოთ საკუთარი დავასწავლობით. როგორც ბაზი მოდელი, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სტანდარტური რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელი კლასიფიკაციის და რეგრესის საშუალებისთვის. ჩვენი სისტემა 48 მოთავსწავლებელი პერსონის 0,557 წერტილი პირველი სკითხვაში და 35 წერტილი პირველი სკითხვაში 20 წერტილი პირველი სკითხვაში 0,464 წერტილი.', 'it': "Adottiamo un approccio di apprendimento multi-task al Task 1 condiviso a SemEval-2018. L'idea generale relativa alla struttura del modello è quella di utilizzare il minor numero possibile di dati esterni al fine di preservare la relazione dei compiti e ridurre la complessità. Impieghiamo l'apprendimento multi-task con hard parameter sharing per sfruttare la relazione tra i sub-task. Come modello base, utilizziamo una rete neurale ricorrente standard sia per le sottoattività di classificazione che di regressione. Il nostro sistema si classifica 32esimo su 48 partecipanti con un punteggio Pearson di 0,557 nella prima sottomissione, e 20esimo su 35 nella quinta sottomissione con un punteggio di precisione di 0,464.", 'mk': 'Ние го прифаќаме пристапот на мултизадачно учење кон заедничката задача 1 во SemEval-2018. The general idea concerning the model structure is to use as little external data as possible in order to preserve the task relatedness and reduce complexity.  Ние користиме мултизадачно учење со тешко делење параметри за да ја искористиме врската помеѓу подзадачите. Како базичен модел, користиме стандардна рецидентна нервна мрежа за класификација и регресија. Нашиот систем се рангира на 32-тото место од 48 учесници со Пирсон оценка од 0,557 во првата подпрашање, а на 20-тото место од 35 во петтата подпрашање со точност од 0,464.', 'lt': 'Įgyvendinant bendrą 1 užduotį, vadovaujamės daugiafunkciniu mokymosi metodu SemEval-2018 m. Bendra mintis, susijusi su modelio struktūra, yra kuo mažiau išorinių duomenų panaudoti siekiant išsaugoti užduoties ryšį ir sumažinti sudėtingumą. Siekdami išnaudoti subužduočių ryšį, naudojame mokymąsi įvairiomis užduotimis su sunkiu parametrų pasidalijimu. Kaip bazinis modelis naudojame standartinį pakartotinį nervinį tinklą klasifikavimo ir regresijos paklausoms. Mūsų sistema yra 32-oji iš 48 dalyvių su Pearson balais 0,557 pirmame paklausime ir 20-oji iš 35 penktame paklausime su tikslumu 0,464.', 'kk': 'Біз бірнеше тапсырманы бірнеше оқыту тәртібін бірінші тапсырманың бірінші тапсырмасына біріктіреміз. Үлгі құрылымы туралы жалпы идея - тапсырманың қатынасын сақтау және әлемділігін азайту үшін сыртқы деректерді қолдану. Біз көптеген тапсырмаларды бақылау параметрлерін ортақтастыру үшін бірнеше тапсырмаларды үйренуді қолданамыз. Негізгі үлгі ретінде, біз классификациясы мен регрессиясы қайталанатын невралдық желі үшін стандартты қайталанатын невралдық желі қолданамыз. Біздің жүйеміз Персондың алғашқы суретінде 0,557 деген 48 қатысушылардың 32-інде және бесінші суретінде 20-інде 0,464 деген дұрыс саны бар.', 'ms': 'Kami mengambil pendekatan pembelajaran berbilang-tugas untuk tugas terkongsi 1 di SemEval-2018. Idea umum yang berkaitan dengan struktur model adalah untuk menggunakan data luaran sebanyak mungkin untuk menjaga hubungan tugas dan mengurangkan kompleksiti. We employ multi-task learning with hard parameter sharing to exploit the relatedness between sub-tasks.  Sebagai model asas, kita gunakan rangkaian saraf yang berulang piawai untuk kedua-dua subtaskan klasifikasi dan regresi. Sistem kita berturut-turut ke-32 daripada 48 peserta dengan skor Pearson 0.557 dalam pertanyaan pertama, dan ke-20 daripada 35 dalam pertanyaan kelima dengan skor akurat 0.464.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018-ല്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്ത പണിയുടെ കാര്യത്തിലേക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല്ലാ പണിയും പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വഴിയാണ്  പുറത്തുള്ള ഡേറ്റായ്ക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യമായിരിക്കുന്നു. ജോലിയുടെ ബന്ധം സൂക്ഷിക്കുകയും സംശയം കുറവാക്കുകയും ച സബ് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കാന്\u200d കഠിനമായ അളവുകള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല ജോലിയ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ മോഡലായിക്കൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമായ നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d ശൃംഖലം ഉപയോഗ ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 48 പങ്കാളികളില്\u200d നിന്ന് 32வதായി നില്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഒന്നാമത്തെ സബ്ജിസില്\u200d 0. 557 സ്കോര്\u200d ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നു. അഞ്ചാമത്തെ സബ്ജ', 'mt': "Aħna nieħdu approċċ ta' tagħlim b'diversi kompiti għall-Kompitu 1 kondiviż f'SemEval-2018. L-idea ġenerali dwar l-istruttura tal-mudell hija li tintuża kemm jista’ jkun ftit dejta esterna sabiex tinżamm ir-rabta mal-kompitu u titnaqqas il-kumplessità. We employ multi-task learning with hard parameter sharing to exploit the relatedness between sub-tasks.  Bħala mudell bażiku, a ħna nużaw netwerk newrali rikorrenti standard kemm għall-klassifikazzjoni kif ukoll għas-sottotalbiet ta’ rigressjoni. Is-sistema tagħna tikklassifika t-32 minn 48 parteċipant b’punteġġ Pearson ta’ 0.557 fl-ewwel sottodomanda, u l-20 minn 35 fil-ħames sottodomanda b’punteġġ ta’ preċiżjoni ta’ 0.464.", 'mn': 'Бид SemEval-2018 оны 1-р ажил дээр олон ажлын суралцах арга зам ашиглаж байна. Загварын бүтцийн тухай ерөнхий санаа нь ажлын холбоотой байдлыг хадгалж, цогцыг багасгах боломжтой бага гадаад мэдээллийг ашиглах юм. Бид олон ажлын сургалтыг суралцах хэцүү параметр хуваалцахад сургалтын хоорондын холбоотой байдлыг ашигладаг. Үндсэн загварын хувьд бид стандарт дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээг хуваалцах болон регрессийн дотор хоёуланг ашигладаг. Бидний систем Персоны 48 оролцогчдын 32-нд анхны суудалд 0.557 оноо авч байна. 5-р суудалд 35-аас 20 нь 0.464 тоо зөв тоо авч байна.', 'no': 'Vi tar ein fleire oppgåver-læringstilnærming til den delte oppgåva 1 på semiEval-2018. Den generelle ideen om modelstrukturen er å bruka så lite eksterne data som er mogleg for å beholda oppgåveliste og redusera kompleksitet. Vi brukar fleire oppgåver med vanskeleg deling av parametrar for å bruka relateten mellom underoppgåver. Som ein grunnmodell bruker vi ein standard gjentakelig neuralnettverk for både underspørjingane for klassifikasjon og regresjon. Sistemet vårt rankerer 32nd av 48 deltakarar med ein Pearson score med 0,557 i den første underspørjinga, og 20 av 35 i den femte underspørjinga med eit nøyaktig score med 0,464.', 'ro': 'Luăm o abordare de învățare multi-sarcină pentru sarcina partajată 1 la SemEval-2018. Ideea generală privind structura modelului este de a utiliza cât mai puține date externe posibil pentru a păstra relația sarcinilor și a reduce complexitatea. Utilizăm învățarea multi-sarcină cu partajarea parametrilor dificilă pentru a exploata relația dintre subsarcini. Ca model de bază, folosim o rețea neurală recurentă standard atât pentru subactivitățile de clasificare, cât și pentru regresie. Sistemul nostru se clasează pe locul 32 din 48 de participanți cu un scor Pearson de 0,557 în primul subactiv și pe locul 20 din 35 în al cincilea subactiv cu un scor de precizie de 0,464.', 'pl': 'Stosujemy wielozadaniowe podejście do uczenia się wspólnego zadania 1 w SemEval-2018. Ogólną ideą dotyczącą struktury modelu jest wykorzystanie jak najmniej danych zewnętrznych w celu zachowania związku z zadaniami i zmniejszenia złożoności. Wykorzystujemy wielozadaniowe uczenie się z twardym współdzieleniem parametrów, aby wykorzystać związek między podzadaniami. Jako model bazowy stosujemy standardową powtarzającą się sieć neuronową zarówno do klasyfikacji, jak i regresji podzadań. Nasz system umieszcza 32-go z 48-tych uczestników z wynikiem Pearsona 0,557 w pierwszym podzadaniu, a 20-tego z 35 w piątym podzadaniu z wynikiem dokładności 0,464.', 'sr': 'Prihvaćamo pristup multizadatka za učenje zajedničkog zadatka 1 na semiEvalu-2018. Generalna ideja o modelskoj strukturi je upotrebu najmanjih vanjskih podataka kako bi sačuvala povezanost zadataka i smanjila kompleksnost. Mi zapošljavamo učenje više zadataka sa teškim parametrima koji delimo kako bi iskoristili odnos između podzadataka. Kao bazni model, koristimo standardnu rekonstruntnu neuralnu mrežu za klasifikaciju i regresiju. Naš sistem je 32nd od 48 sudionika sa rezultatom Pearson a od 0,557 u prvom podpitanju, a 20 od 35 u petom podpitanju sa tačnim rezultatom od 0,464.', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වල සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් 1 වලට. සාමාන්\u200dය අදහසය මොඩල් සංවිධානය ගැන පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන අපි ගොඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න අමාරු පැරැමිටර් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. මූලික මොඩේල් වලින්, අපි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක න්\u200dයුරෝල ජාලය භාවිත කරන්නේ විශේෂණය සහ ප්\u200dර අපේ පද්ධතිය පියර්සන් ස්කෝට් එක්ක 0,557 ක් තියෙන්නේ 32වෙනි ස්ථානයක් තියෙන්නේ, පස්සම් ස්කෝට් එක්ක හරියට 0,464 ක් තියෙන්නේ.', 'so': 'Waxaynu u qabannaa qaabilaad waxbarasho badan oo u dhexeeya shaqada 1 ee SemEval-2018. Fikirada caadiga ah oo ku saabsan tusaale ahaan waa in lagu isticmaalo macluumaad dibadda ah sida ugu suurtowda in lagu ilaaliyo xiriirka shaqada iyo in la gaabiyo complex. Waxaynu shaqaynaynaa waxbarasho badan oo aad u qaybsanaysaa parameter adag si aan ugu baaraano xiriirka u dhexeeya shaqada hoose. Tusaale asal ah, waxaynu isticmaalnaa shabakadda neurada ee caadiga ah oo ku soo degaysa, taasoo ah fasaxa iyo dib u celinta. Isticmaddeena waxaa ka mid ah 32aad oo ka mid ah 48-ka qayb-qeyb-qaadayaasha Pearson koox 0.557 oo koox koox u dhexaysa, safka shanaadna waxaa ka mid ah 20aad oo ku qoran koox sax ah 0.464.', 'ta': 'We take a multi-task learning approach to the shared Task 1 at SemEval-2018.  மாதிரி உருவமைப்பு பற்றிய பொது யோசனை சிறிய வெளி தகவலை பயன்படுத்த முடியும். பணியின் இணைப்பை பாதுகாக்க மற்றும் சிக்கலை கு நாங்கள் பல பணிகள் கற்றல் கடினமான அளபுருவுகள் பங்கிடுவதற்கு உப பணிகளுக்கிடையில் துணை தொடர்பை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு. அடிப்படை மாதிரியாக, நாம் வகுப்பு மற்றும் திரும்ப துணை பணிகளுக்கும் ஒரு நிலையான திரும்பப் பாதுகார நெருக்கி முதல் துணை பணியில் 0. 557 பெயர்சன் மதிப்புள்ளி இருந்து எங்கள் அமைப்பு 48 பங்கீட்டாளர்களில் 32வது வரிசையில் இருக்கிறது, மேலும் 35 ல் 20வது ஐந்தாவது', 'sv': 'Vi tar ett flerfunktionslärande förhållningssätt till den delade uppgiften 1 på SemEval-2018. Den allmänna idén kring modellstrukturen är att använda så lite externa data som möjligt för att bevara uppgiftsrelationen och minska komplexiteten. Vi använder multi-task learning med hård parameterdelning för att utnyttja relationen mellan underuppgifter. Som grundmodell använder vi ett vanligt återkommande neuralt nätverk för både klassificering och regression. Vårt system rankar 32:a av 48 deltagare med en Pearson-poäng på 0,557 i den första deluppgiften och 20:e av 35 i den femte deluppgiften med en noggrannhetspoäng på 0,464.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک مشترک ٹاکس ۱ کی ملی ٹاکس کی تعلیم کی طریقہ لیتے ہیں۔ موڈل ساختاری کے بارے میں عمومی نظر یہ ہے کہ کوشش کی تعلق اور پیچیدگی کی حفاظت کرنے کے لئے بہت کم بیرونی ڈیٹا استعمال کرنا ہے. ہم بہت سے کاموں کی تعلیم کو سخت پارامیٹر کے ساتھ شریک کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ sub-tasks کے درمیان رابطہ استعمال کریں. بنسٹ موڈل کے طور پر، ہم ایک استاندارڈ ریکرینٹ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کا استعمال کر رہے ہیں کلاسپیٹ اور ریگریشن سٹسٹسٹسٹ کے لئے۔ ہمارا سیستم 48 مشرکین میں سے 32ن درجہ ہے جو پہلی سٹپوسٹ میں 0.557 کی سٹپوسٹ میں ہے اور پانچویں سٹپوسٹ میں سے ۲۰ درجہ ہے جو 0.464 کی سٹپوسٹ میں ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz SemEval-2018'da bir necha vazifa o'rganishni o'rganishga qaramamiz. Name Biz bir nechta vazifa o'rganish parametrlari bilan ishlayapmiz, tub vazifalar orasidagi aloqalarni ishlab chiqarish uchun. Asosiy modeli sifatida biz darajalashtirish va boshqarish vazifalari uchun andoza davom tarmoqni foydalanamiz. Bizning sistemiz 48 ta'qituvchidan 32inchi birinchi sub-vazifa 0.557 dan 0.557 bo'lgan Pearson scori bo'lgan va 35 dan 20 dan foydalanuvchi 0.464 dan foydalanuvchi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi có một phương pháp học tập đa nhiệm vụ chung ở Semkhai-thẩm 8. Ý tưởng chung về cấu trúc mô hình là sử dụng càng ít dữ liệu bên ngoài càng tốt để bảo vệ liên quan các nhiệm vụ và giảm sự phức tạp. Chúng tôi sử dụng việc học nhiều nhiệm vụ với việc chia sẻ các tham số khó khăn để khai thác mối quan hệ giữa các công việc. Là mô hình nền, chúng tôi sử dụng một mạng thần kinh thường xuyên lập lại cho cả các yêu cầu phân loại và phục hồi. Hệ thống của chúng ta xếp hàng 32nd ra ngoài 48 với một chuỗi Pearson of 0.57 trong phần đầu tiên và hai trên 35 trong phần thứ năm phụ đề với một điểm chính xác 0.46.94.', 'nl': 'We hanteren een multi-task leeraanpak voor de gedeelde taak 1 bij SemEval-2018. Het algemene idee van de modelstructuur is om zo min mogelijk externe gegevens te gebruiken om de taakgerelateerdheid te behouden en complexiteit te verminderen. We gebruiken multi-task learning met hard parameter sharing om de relatie tussen subtaken te benutten. Als basismodel gebruiken we een standaard terugkerend neuraal netwerk voor zowel de classificatie als de regressie subtaken. Ons systeem rangschikt 32e van 48 deelnemers met een Pearson score van 0.557 in de eerste subtaak, en 20ste van 35 in de vijfde subtaak met een nauwkeurigheidsscore van 0.464.', 'bg': 'Приемаме подход за многозадачи към споделената задача 1 на СемЕвал-2018. Общата идея относно структурата на модела е да се използват възможно най-малко външни данни, за да се запази свързаността на задачата и да се намали сложността. Използваме многозадачно обучение с твърдо споделяне на параметри, за да използваме връзката между подзадачите. Като основен модел използваме стандартна рецидивираща невронна мрежа както за подзадачите за класификация, така и за регресия. Системата ни се нарежда на 32-ро място от 48 участници с оценка на Пиърсън от 0,557 в първата подзадача и на 20-о място от 35 в петата подзадача с оценка на точност от 0,464.', 'da': 'Vi tager en multi-task learning tilgang til den fælles opgave 1 på SemEval-2018. Den generelle idé vedrørende modelstrukturen er at anvende så lidt eksterne data som muligt for at bevare opgaveforholdet og reducere kompleksiteten. Vi anvender multi-task learning med hård parameterdeling for at udnytte relationen mellem underopgaver. Som grundmodel bruger vi et standard tilbagevendende neuralt netværk til både klassificering og regression underopgaver. Vores system rangerer 32. ud af 48 deltagere med en Pearson score på 0,557 i den første underopgave og 20. ud af 35 i den femte underopgave med en nøjagtighed score på 0,464.', 'de': 'Wir verfolgen einen Multi-Task-Lernansatz für die gemeinsame Aufgabe 1 bei SemEval-2018. Die Grundidee der Modellstruktur besteht darin, möglichst wenig externe Daten zu verwenden, um die Aufgabenbeziehung zu erhalten und Komplexität zu reduzieren. Wir setzen Multi-Task-Learning mit hartem Parametersharing ein, um die Verwandtschaft zwischen Teilaufgaben auszunutzen. Als Basismodell verwenden wir sowohl für die Klassifikations- als auch für Regressions-Teilaufgaben ein standardmäßiges rezidivierendes neuronales Netzwerk. Unser System rangiert 32nd von 48 Teilnehmern mit einem Pearson Score von 0.557 in der ersten Teilaufgabe und 20th von 35 in der fünften Teilaufgabe mit einer Genauigkeit von 0.464.', 'hr': 'Uzimamo višezadatačni pristup učenju zajedničkom zadatku 1 na semiEvalu-2018. Općenita ideja o strukturi modela je upotrebu što je moguće manje vanjskih podataka kako bi očuvala povezanost zadataka i smanjila kompleksnost. Mi zapošljavamo učenje višezadataka sa teškim parametrima dijeljenja kako bi iskoristili odnos između podzadataka. Kao bazni model, koristimo standardnu rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu za podsticaje klasifikacije i regresije. Naš sustav čini 32nd od 48 učesnika s Pearsonovom rezultatom od 0,557 u prvom podpitanju, a 20 od 35 u petom podpitanju s preciznim rezultatom od 0,464.', 'id': 'Kami mengambil pendekatan pembelajaran multi-tugas untuk Tugas 1 bersama di SemEval-2018. Ide umum yang berkaitan dengan struktur model adalah untuk menggunakan data luar yang paling sedikit yang mungkin untuk menjaga hubungan tugas dan mengurangi kompleksitas. Kami menggunakan belajar multi-tugas dengan berbagi parameter sulit untuk mengeksploitasi hubungan antara sub-tugas. Sebagai model dasar, kita menggunakan jaringan saraf rekuren standar untuk kedua subtasks klasifikasi dan regresi. Sistem kami rank ke-32 dari 48 peserta dengan skor Pearson 0,557 dalam subtask pertama, dan ke-20 dari 35 dalam subtask kelima dengan skor akurasi 0,464.', 'fa': 'ما روش یادگیری بسیار زیادی از کارها را به کار مشترک ۱ در نیم اول-۲۰۱۸ می گیریم. ایده عمومی درباره ساختار مدل این است که به اندازه کمی از داده های خارجی که ممکن است استفاده کنید تا نگه داشتن مربوط به کار و کاهش پیچیدگی است. ما از یادگیری بسیاری از کارها استفاده می کنیم با مشترک پارامتر سخت برای استفاده از ارتباط بین کارهای زیر کار. به عنوان یک مدل پایین، ما از شبکه عصبی استاندارد دوباره استفاده می کنیم برای هر دو قسمت\u200cبندی و پایین\u200cبندی استفاده می\u200cکنیم. سیستم ما 32م از 48 شرکت کننده با امتیاز پرسون 0.557 در اولین زیستپرس و بیست از 35 در پنجم زیستپرس با امتیاز دقیق 0.464 است.', 'ko': '우리는 SemEval-2018에서 공유 퀘스트 1에 대해 다중 퀘스트 학습 방법을 채택했다.모델 구조에 대한 일반적인 생각은 가능한 한 적은 외부 데이터를 사용하여 임무의 관련성을 유지하고 복잡성을 낮추는 것이다.우리는 하드 파라미터가 공유된 다중 임무 학습을 이용하여 하위 임무 간의 관련성을 이용한다.기초 모델로서 우리는 분류와 회귀 서브 임무에 대해 표준적인 귀속 신경 네트워크를 사용한다.우리 시스템은 참가자 48명 중 32위, 첫 번째 미션 피어슨은 0.557점, 다섯 번째 미션 35점 중 20위, 정확도는 0.464점을 기록했다.', 'sw': 'Tunachukua mbinu za kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi katika kazi hii ya ushirikiano katika SemEval-2018. Wazo la jumla kuhusu muundo huo ni kutumia takwimu za nje kama inavyowezekana ili kulinda uhusiano na kupunguza utata. Tunajiri kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi kwa kiwango kigumu cha kushirikiana kwa kutumia uhusiano kati ya kazi za subira. Kama modeli ya msingi, tunatumia mtandao wa kawaida wa neura unaoendelea kwa ajili ya mipango ya kutangaza na kudhibiti. Mfumo wetu una washiriki 32nd kati ya 48 wenye kipindi cha Pearson 0.557 katika juhudi la kwanza, na 20 kati ya 35 katika juhudi la tano kwa kiwango sahihi cha 0.464.', 'af': "Ons neem 'n multi-taak leer toegang na die gedeelde taak 1 by SemEval-2018. Die algemene idee aangaande die model struktuur is om so klein eksterne data as moontlik te gebruik om die taak verpligtigheid te bewaar en kompleksiteit te verminder. Ons gebruik multi-taak leer met moeilike parameter deel om die verwantigheid tussen sub-taak te gebruik. As 'n basis model, gebruik ons 'n standaard herhaalde neuralnetwerk vir beide die klassifikasie en regresie subtaske. Ons stelsel rank 32nd uit 48 deelnimmers met 'n Pearson skaal van 0,557 in die eerste subvraag, en 20 uit 35 in die vyfde subvraag met 'n presisiteitstelling van 0,464.", 'tr': "SemEval-2018'de bir nusga öwrenmek üçin bir nusga çykýarys. Model yapısı hakkındaki umumiy fikir, görevi bağlantısını korumak ve karmaşıklığını azaltmak üçin az dış veri olaraq kullanmak. Biz köp-täblik öwrenmesini kyn parameterler bilen ulanýarys, sub-täblikler arasyndaky syýahatlary ulanmak üçin. Basit nusga bolsa, ikimiz klasifikasyon we regressiýa çykyşymyz üçin standart bir tekrarly näral şebekeni ulanýarys. Biziň sistemamyz 48-nji pirson sanyndaky 0,557 sany ilkinji alt soragynda 32-nji derejede, we 5-nji alt soragynda 20-nji derejede 0,464 derejesi bar.", 'sq': 'Ne marrim një qasje mësimi me shumë detyra për detyrën e përbashkët 1 në SemEval-2018. The general idea concerning the model structure is to use as little external data as possible in order to preserve the task relatedness and reduce complexity.  Ne përdorim mësim shumë-detyrash me ndarje të vështirë parametrash për të shfrytëzuar lidhjen midis nëndetyrave. Si një model bazë, ne përdorim një rrjet nervor të përsëritur standart si për klasifikimin ashtu edhe për nëndetyrat e regresionit. Sistemi ynë renditet i 32-i nga 48 pjesëmarrës me një pikë Pearson prej 0.557 në nënpyetjen e parë dhe i 20-i nga 35 në nënpyetjen e pestë me një pikë saktësie prej 0.464.', 'am': 'በSemEval-2018 በተካፈሉት ስራ 1 ላይ በብዙ ስራ ትምህርት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሞዴል ሥርዓት ላይ የሚደረገው የውጭው ዳታዎችን እንደሚቻል እና የስራውን ግንኙነት ለመጠበቅ እና ውጤታውን ለማጎድል ነው፡፡ በጥንታዊ ስራ መካከል ግንኙነትን ለመፍጠር በብዙ ስራ ትምህርት እናስገራለን፡፡ እንደ መሠረት ምሳሌ፣ ለክፍል እና ለመደገፍ ደብዳቤ ደብዳቤ መረብ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የፊርሶን መስኮት 0.557 ተካሄደ ከ48 ተካባሪዎቻችን 32ኛ ይደረጋል፥ ከአምስተኛውም በትዊተር ውስጥ 20ኛው የ0.464 ትክክለኛ ደረጃ ይኖራል።', 'hy': 'We take a multi-task learning approach to the shared Task 1 at SemEval-2018.  Մոդելի կառուցվածքի ընդհանուր գաղափարն այն է, որ հնարավորինս քիչ արտաքին տվյալներ օգտագործենք, որպեսզի պահպանենք առաջադրանքի կապը և նվազեցնենք բարդությունը: We employ multi-task learning with hard parameter sharing to exploit the relatedness between sub-tasks.  Որպես հիմնական մոդել, մենք օգտագործում ենք ստանդարտ կրկնվող նյարդային ցանց դասակարգման և ռեգրեսիայի ենթախնդիրների համար: Մեր համակարգը 48 մասնակիցներից 32-րդ դասակարգում է, որն առաջին ենթահարցում 0.557 է, իսկ հինգերորդ ենթահարցում 35-րդ՝ 0.464 ճշգրիտ:', 'bs': 'Prihvaćamo pristup multizadatka učenju zajedničkom zadatku 1 na semiEvalu-2018. Generalna ideja o modelskoj strukturi je upotrebu što je moguće manje vanjskih podataka kako bi sačuvala povezanost zadataka i smanjila kompleksnost. Mi zapošljavamo učenje multizadataka sa teškom dijelom parametara kako bi iskoristili odnos između podzadataka. Kao bazni model, koristimo standardnu rekonstruntnu neuralnu mrežu za podsticaje klasifikacije i regresije. Naš sistem rankira 32nd od 48 učesnika sa rezultatom Pearson a od 0,557 u prvom podpitanju, a 20 od 35 u petom podpitanju sa tačnim rezultatom od 0,464.', 'cs': 'Přijímáme víceúkolový učební přístup ke sdílenému úkolu 1 na SemEval-2018. Obecnou myšlenkou týkající se struktury modelu je využít co nejméně externích dat, aby se zachovala souvislost úkolů a snížila složitost. Využíváme víceúkolové učení s tvrdým sdílením parametrů k využití souvislosti mezi dílčími úkoly. Jako základní model používáme standardní rekurentní neuronovou síť jak pro klasifikaci, tak pro regresní dílčí úkoly. Náš systém řadí 32náctý z 48 účastníků s Pearsonovým skórem 0,557 v prvním dílčím úkolu a dvacátý z 35 v pátém dílčím úkolu s přesnostním skórem 0,464.', 'az': "Biz bir çox işin öyrənməsi tərzini SemEval-2018-də paylaşılan 1-ci işə götürürük. Model quruluğu haqqında genel fikir mümkün olduğu qədər küçük dış verilər istifadə etmək və işləri bağlı tutmaq və kompleksitəni azaltmaq üçün istifadə etməkdir. Biz çoxlu işin öyrənməsini zor parametrlə istifadə edirik ki, alt işlərin bağlılığını istifadə etmək üçün. Bütün modellər olaraq, ikisi də klasifikasiya və regresiya aparılması üçün standart yenidən bir nöral a ğı kullanırıq. Sistemimiz Pirson'un 0,557 dəqiqəsi ilə 48 dəqiqəsindən 32 dəqiqəsi və 5 dəqiqəsində 35 dəqiqəsindən 20 dəqiq dəqiqəsi 0,464 dəqiqəsi ilə.", 'bn': 'আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৮-এ শেয়ার কর্মসূচির কাজের প্রতি অনেক কাজ শিক্ষার পদক্ষেপ নিয়েছি। মডেল কাঠামোর ব্যাপারে সাধারণ চিন্তা হচ্ছে বাইরের তথ্য যতটা সম্ভব তা ব্যবহার করা যাতে কাজের সংযোগ সংরক্ষণ করা এবং কঠিন পরিম আমরা মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষা করি সাব-কাজের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক ব্যবহার করার জন্য কঠিন পরামিতি শেয়ার করার জন্য। বেস মডেল হিসেবে আমরা একটি স্বাভাবিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করি শ্রেণীকরণ এবং পুনরাবৃত্তিক সাবটাসের জন্য। ৪৮ জন অংশগ্রহণকারীদের মধ্যে আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রথম সাবটাবাজে পেয়ার্সন স্কোরের মধ্যে ৩২ তারিখ এবং পাঁচমাত্র সাবটাজে ৩৫ থেকে ২০ সালে', 'ca': "Prenem un enfocament d'aprenentatge multitascat a la tasca compartida 1 a SemEval-2018. La idea general relativa a l'estructura del model és utilitzar tan poca data externa com sigui possible per preservar la relació entre les tasques i reduir la complexitat. Empreguem aprenentatge multitascat amb compartir paràmetres difícils per explotar la relació entre subtasques. Com a model de base, fem servir una xarxa neural recurrent estàndard tant per a les subtaskes de classificació com de regressió. El nostre sistema es classifica en 32 de cada 48 participants amb una puntuació de Pearson de 0,557 en la primera subpregunta, i en 20 de cada 35 en la quinta subpregunta amb una puntuació de precisió de 0,464.", 'et': 'Võtame SemEval-2018 jagatud ülesandele 1 mitme ülesandega õppimise lähenemisviisi. Mudelistruktuuri üldine idee on kasutada võimalikult vähe välisandmeid, et säilitada ülesande seos ja vähendada keerukust. Me kasutame mitme ülesandega õppimist koos raske parameetrite jagamisega, et ära kasutada allülesannete vahelist seost. Baasmudelina kasutame standardset korduvat närvivõrku nii klassifikatsiooni kui ka regressiooni alamülesannete jaoks. Meie süsteem on 48 osalejast 32. kohal Pearsoni skooriga 0,557 esimeses alamülesandes ja 20. kohal 35-st viiendas alamülesandes täpsuskooriga 0,464.', 'fi': 'SemEval-2018:n yhteiseen tehtävään 1 sovelletaan monitehtäväoppimista. Mallirakenteen yleisenä ajatuksena on käyttää mahdollisimman vähän ulkoista tietoa tehtävän sidossuhteen säilyttämiseksi ja monimutkaisuuden vähentämiseksi. Käytämme monitehtäväoppimista ja kovaa parametrinjakoa hyödyntääksemme alitehtävien välistä suhdetta. Perusmallina käytämme vakiomuotoista toistuvaa hermoverkkoa sekä luokitus- että regressioalitehtäviin. Järjestelmämme sijoittuu 32. sijalle 48 osallistujasta Pearson-pisteellä 0,557 ensimmäisessä alatehtävässä ja 20. sijalle 35 viidennessä alatehtävässä tarkkuudella 0,464.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngewehi sistem multi-task kanggo ngilanggar nggawe task 1 nang semebal-2013. Algorithm Awakdhéwé nggunakake multi-task ömripan lan gampang gerapakan karo pod-task gak nggawe barang nggawe Sampeyan model, kita ngawe gunaké awak dhéwé, nggo Kemerdekaan tanggal nggo Kemerdekaan karo Resolusi Sistem awak dhéwé rangsak 32 saiki ono 48patik sing perusahaan karo 0.587 dadi sing perusahaan, lan warni-warni tanggal 3 saiki sing katêpakan karo perusahaan sing katêpakan karo 0.484.', 'he': 'אנחנו לוקחים גישה למידה רבה משימות למשימה המשותפת 1 בסמיוול-2018. הרעיון הכללי בנוגע למבנה המודל הוא להשתמש במידע חיצוני קטן ככל האפשר כדי לשמור על קשר המשימה ולפחות מורכבות. אנחנו משתמשים ללמוד במשימות רבות עם חלקת פרמטרים קשה כדי לנצל את הקשר בין משימות תת. כדוגמנית בסיסית, אנו משתמשים ברשת עצבית מתחזרה סטנדרטית עבור שתי השאלות של ההקלטה והגירוס. המערכת שלנו מצוות 32 מתוך 48 משתתפים עם נקודת פירסון של 0.557 בתא השאלה הראשונה, ו-20 מתוך 35 בתא השאלה החמישית עם נקודת מדויקה של 0.464.', 'sk': 'Pri skupni nalogi 1 na SemEval-2018 uporabljamo večopravilni učni pristop. Splošna ideja glede strukture modela je uporaba čim manj zunanjih podatkov, da se ohrani povezanost nalog in zmanjša kompleksnost. Za izkoriščanje povezanosti med podnalogami uporabljamo večopravilno učenje s trdo delitvijo parametrov. Kot osnovni model uporabljamo standardno ponavljajočo se nevronsko omrežje za klasifikacijo in regresijo podnalog. Naš sistem se uvršča na 32. od 48 udeležencev s Pearsonovo oceno 0,557 v prvi podnalogi in 20. od 35 v peti podnalogi z oceno natančnosti 0,464.', 'ha': "Tuna sami aikin mu masu ƙaranci zuwa ga rabin aikin 1 a SemEl-2018. Maɓallin idãna wanda ke samun ayuka shine ya yi amfani da data masu ƙaranci don a iya amfani da shi don a iya yiwuwa dõmin a tsare masu hushi ga aikin kuma ya ƙara masu hushi. Tuna aiki masu ƙaranci da shirin parameteri mai tsanani dõmin ka yi amfani da abin da ke tsakanin task õki. Kama wani misali, za'a yi amfani da jerin neural wanda aka daura wa zaman shawarar da aka yi amfani da shi. Tsarinmu na kamfata 32nd daga 48 mãsu haɗi da ma'aunin Pearson na 0.557 na farkon aikin na farko, da 20 daga 35 a cikin fassaran 5 na da wani nau'in taƙaita na 0.464.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་SemEval-2018 ལ་མཉམ་དུ་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྦྲེལ་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བཞག་ཡོད། The general idea concerning the model structure is to use as little external data as possible in order to preserve the task relatedness and reduce complexity. We employ multi-task learning with hard parameter sharing to exploit the relationship between sub-tasks. རྨང་གཞི་མ་དབྱིབས་ལ་ངེས་ཚོགས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་regression ར་སྡུད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་ལ་ཐོག་གྲངས ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་རྒྱལ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་འདི་༤༨་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཚད་ལྡན་༠.557ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'EmoNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'ar': 'EmoNLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية باللغة الإنجليزية مع أسلوب شجرة الانحدار المعزز للتدرج و LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه', 'fr': "EmonLP à SemeVal-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Prédiction des emojis anglais avec méthode d'arbre de régression augmentant le gradient et LSTM bidirectionnel", 'es': 'EmonLP en Semeval-2018 Tarea 2: predicción de emoji en inglés con el método del árbol de regresión de aumento de degradado y LSTM bidireccional', 'pt': 'EmoNLP no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Previsão de emojis em inglês com método de árvore de regressão com aumento de gradiente e LSTM bidirecional', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のEmoNLPタスク2 ：グラデーションブースト回帰ツリー法と双方向LSTMを用いた英語の絵文字予測', 'zh': 'EmoNLP at SemEval-2018 任 2:用梯度升归树法及双向 LSTM 英语表情符号占', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर EmoNLP: ग्रेडिएंट बूस्टिंग प्रतिगमन ट्री विधि और द्विदिश LSTM के साथ अंग्रेजी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'EmoNLP на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Прогнозирование английских эмодзи с помощью метода дерева регрессии с усилением градиента и двунаправленной LSTM', 'ga': 'EmoNLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Béarla Tuar Emoji le Modh Crann Aischéimnithe a Neartaíonn Grádán agus LSTM Déthreo', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: Αγγλική πρόβλεψη με μέθοδο δέντρου αναδρομής και αμφίδρομη μέθοδο', 'hu': 'EmoNLP a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: angol emoji jóslás átmenetet fokozó regressziós fa módszerrel és kétirányú LSTM', 'ka': 'EmoNLP SemEval-2018 დავალება 2: ანგლისური ემოზია პრედიციენტის გახსნა რეგრესიის ხე მეტი და ორედირექციონალური LSTM', 'it': "EmoNLP a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Prediczione Emoji inglese con il metodo dell'albero di regressione e LSTM bidirezionale", 'lt': 'EmoNLP SemEval-2018 2 užduotis: anglų Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'ЭмоNLP 2. тапсырмасының жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында: Градиентті көтеру регрессия бұтақ әдісі мен екі бағытты LSTM көңіл көңіл көңіл', 'ms': 'EmoNLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Prediksi Emoji Inggeris dengan Kaedah Tree Regression Meningkatkan Gradien dan LSTM Dua Arah', 'mt': 'EmoNLP f’SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: ഗ്രേഡിയനെന്റ് ബുസ്റ്റിങ്ങ് റെഗ്രെക്ഷന്\u200d വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് എമോണ്\u200d', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'EmoNLP la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Predicția emojilor în limba engleză cu metoda arborelui de regresie a gradientului și LSTM bidirecțională', 'pl': 'EmoNLP w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Angielska prognoza emoji z metodą drzewa regresji gradientowej i dwukierunkową LSTM', 'so': 'EmoNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Ingiriis Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'sv': 'EmoNLP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Engelska Emoji Prediction med Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Metod och Tvåriktad LSTM', 'si': 'EmoNLP at Halfeval-2018 Job 2: English Emobi Precdiction', 'sr': 'EmoNLP na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: predviđanje engleskih emoji sa metodom gradjanta jačanja regresije drveta i dvosmjernog LSTM', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் EmoNLP 2: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'uz': 'EmoNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'vi': 'EmoNLP at SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 2: Anh Emoji prediction with Gradient Boosting Regrition Tree Method and Bidđạo LSTM', 'da': 'EmoNLP på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Engelsk Emoji Forudsigelse med Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Metode og Bidirektiv LSTM', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Прогнозиране на английски емоджи с метода на регресионното дърво за повишаване на градиента и двупосочен ЛСМ', 'hr': 'EmoNLP na pola evaluacije-2018 zadatak 2: predviđanje engleskog Emojija s metodom gradjanta jačanja regresije drveta i dvosmjernog LSTM', 'nl': 'EmoNLP bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Engels Emoji Voorspelling met Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method en Bidirectionele LSTM', 'de': 'Aufgabe 2: Englische Emoji-Vorhersage mit Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Methode und bidirektionaler LSTM', 'id': 'EmoNLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Prediksi Emoji Inggris dengan Gradient Boosting Tree Method dan LSTM Bidirectional', 'ko': 'SemEval-18퀘스트2: 사다리꼴로 회귀트리 추진 방법과 쌍방향 LSTM으로 영어 표정 예측', 'sw': 'EmoNLP kwenye SemEval-2018 Kazi 2: Udhibiti wa Kiingereza wa Emoji na Mti wa Kudhibiti Udhibiti na Uongozi LSTM', 'tr': 'EmoNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Iňlisçe Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'af': 'EmoNLP by SemEval- 2018 Opdrag 2: Engels Emoji voorskou met Gradient Boosting Regresie Boom Metode en Bidireksionale LSTM', 'fa': 'EmoNLP در ماموریت ۲۰۱۸: پیشنهاد ایموزی انگلیسی با روش درخت درخت افزایش گرادیان و دو مسیر LSTM', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 2: İngiliz Emoji Prediction with Gradient Increasing Regression Tree Method and Two Directional LSTM', 'sq': 'EmoNLP në SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'hy': 'EmoNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'am': 'EmoNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'bs': 'EmoNLP na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 2: predviđanje engleskog Emojija sa metodom gradjanta jačanja regresije drveta i dvosmjernog LSTM', 'cs': 'Úkol 2: Předpověď emoji v angličtině s metodou regresního stromu gradientu a obousměrným LSTM', 'ca': 'EmoNLP a SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: গ্রেডেন্ট বুস্টিং নিয়ন্ত্রণ বৃক্ষ এবং বাইডেডিয়াল এলএসএমএমএর সাথে ইংরেজী ইমোজি প্রেকশন', 'et': 'EmoNLP SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: inglise emoji prognoos gradienti suurendamise regressioonipuu meetodi ja kahesuunalise LSTM-iga', 'fi': 'EmoNLP SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Englanti Emoji Ennuste Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method ja Kaksisuuntainen LSTM', 'jv': 'EMONLP at semi-2008 task 2: englisi emuji predikion with GradGradGradient', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'EmoNLP na SemEval-2018 2. naloga: napoved angleških emojijev z metodo regresijskega drevesa za povečanje gradienta in dvosmernim LSTM', 'he': 'EmoNLP ב SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Tree Regression Method and Bidirectional LSTM', 'bo': 'EmoNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: English Emoji Prediction with Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method and Bidirectional LSTM'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system used in the English Emoji Prediction Task 2 at the SemEval-2018. Our system is based on two supervised machine learning algorithms : Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) and Bidirectional Long Short-term Memory Network (BLSTM). Besides the common features, we extract various lexicon and syntactic features from external resources. After comparing the results of two algorithms, GBM is chosen for the final evaluation.', 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro sistema utilizado en la Tarea de Predicción de Emoji 2 en inglés en SemEval-2018. Nuestro sistema se basa en dos algoritmos de aprendizaje automático supervisados: el método de árbol de regresión con aumento de gradiente (GBM) y la red de memoria bidireccional a corto plazo (BLSTM). Además de las características comunes, extraemos varios léxicos y funciones sintácticas de recursos externos. Después de comparar los resultados de dos algoritmos, se elige GBM para la evaluación final.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا المستخدم في مهمة توقع الرموز التعبيرية باللغة الإنجليزية 2 في SemEval-2018. يعتمد نظامنا على خوارزميتين للتعلم الآلي تحت الإشراف: طريقة شجرة الانحدار لتعزيز التدرج (GBM) وشبكة الذاكرة ثنائية الاتجاه طويلة المدى (BLSTM). إلى جانب الميزات المشتركة ، نقوم باستخراج العديد من الميزات النحوية والمفردات من المصادر الخارجية. بعد مقارنة نتائج خوارزميتين ، يتم اختيار GBM للتقييم النهائي.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système utilisé dans la tâche 2 de prédiction d'emoji en anglais lors du SEMEVAL-2018. Notre système est basé sur deux algorithmes d'apprentissage automatique supervisé\xa0: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) et Bidirectional Long Short-Term Memory Network (BLSTM). Outre les fonctionnalités communes, nous extrayons divers lexiques et caractéristiques syntaxiques à partir de ressources externes. Après avoir comparé les résultats de deux algorithmes, GBM est choisi pour l'évaluation finale.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema usado na Tarefa 2 de previsão de emojis em inglês no SemEval-2018. Nosso sistema é baseado em dois algoritmos de aprendizado de máquina supervisionados: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) e Bidirectional Long Short-term Memory Network (BLSTM). Além dos recursos comuns, extraímos vários recursos léxicos e sintáticos de recursos externos. Após comparar os resultados de dois algoritmos, o GBM é escolhido para a avaliação final.', 'ja': '本稿では， SemEval -2018の英語絵文字予測タスク2で用いられたシステムについて述べる．当社のシステムは、勾配ブースト回帰ツリー法（ GBM ）と双方向長期記憶ネットワーク（ BLSTM ）の2つの監視対象機械学習アルゴリズムに基づいています。共通の機能に加えて、外部リソースからさまざまな辞書機能と構文機能を抽出します。2つのアルゴリズムの結果を比較した後、GBMが最終評価に選択されます。', 'zh': '本文言SemEval-2018之英语表情符号,2用之统也。 二监机器学算法:梯度擢归树法(GBM)、双向长短期记网络(BLSTM)。 自同征外,取诸词典句法于外。 既校二算,择GBM终评。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 में अंग्रेजी इमोजी पूर्वानुमान कार्य 2 में उपयोग की जाने वाली हमारी प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है। हमारा सिस्टम दो पर्यवेक्षित मशीन लर्निंग एल्गोरिदम पर आधारित है: ग्रेडिएंट बूस्टिंग रिग्रेशन ट्री मेथड (जीबीएम) और द्विदिश दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक मेमोरी नेटवर्क (बीएलएसटीएम)। आम विशेषताओं के अलावा, हम बाहरी संसाधनों से विभिन्न शब्दकोश और वाक्यात्मक सुविधाओं को निकालते हैं। दो एल्गोरिदम के परिणामों की तुलना करने के बाद, जीबीएम को अंतिम मूल्यांकन के लिए चुना जाता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система, используемая в задаче 2 прогнозирования английских эмодзи на SemEval-2018. Наша система основана на двух контролируемых алгоритмах машинного обучения: метод дерева регрессии с усилением градиента (GBM) и двунаправленная сеть краткосрочной памяти (BLSTM). Помимо общих признаков, мы извлекаем различные лексические и синтаксические признаки из внешних ресурсов. После сравнения результатов двух алгоритмов выбирается GBM для окончательной оценки.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras a úsáidtear sa Bhéarla Emoji Prediction Task 2 ag an SemEval-2018. Tá ár gcóras bunaithe ar dhá algartam meaisínfhoghlama maoirsithe: Modh Crann Aischéimnithe Treisiú Grádán (GBM) agus Líonra Cuimhne Gearrthéarmach Déthreorach (BLSTM). Seachas na gnéithe coitianta, bainimid gnéithe éagsúla foclóireachta agus comhréire as acmhainní seachtracha. Tar éis comparáid a dhéanamh idir torthaí dhá algartam, roghnaítear GBM don mheastóireacht deiridh.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας που χρησιμοποιείται στην αγγλική εργασία πρόβλεψης 2 στο SemEval-2018. Το σύστημά μας βασίζεται σε δύο εποπτευόμενους αλγόριθμους μηχανικής μάθησης: τη μέθοδο βαθμιαίας ενίσχυσης του δέντρου αναδρομής (και το δικατευθυνόμενο μακροπρόθεσμο δίκτυο μνήμης (BLSTM). Εκτός από τα κοινά χαρακτηριστικά, εξάγουμε διάφορα λεξικά και συντακτικά χαρακτηριστικά από εξωτερικούς πόρους. Μετά τη σύγκριση των αποτελεσμάτων δύο αλγορίθμων, επιλέγεται για την τελική αξιολόγηση.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 angol Emoji Prediction Task 2-ben használt rendszerünket. Rendszerünk két felügyelt gépi tanulási algoritmuson alapul: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) és Bidirectional Long Short-Term Memory Network (BLSTM). A közös jellemzők mellett külső erőforrásokból különböző lexikonokat és szintaktikai jellemzőket is kivonunk. Két algoritmus eredményének összehasonlítása után GBM-t választunk a végső értékeléshez.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema utilizzato nell'Emoji Prediction Task 2 inglese al SemEval-2018. Il nostro sistema si basa su due algoritmi di apprendimento automatico supervisionati: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) e Bidirectional Long Short-Term Memory Network (BLSTM). Oltre alle caratteristiche comuni, estraiamo varie funzionalità lessicali e sintattiche da risorse esterne. Dopo aver confrontato i risultati di due algoritmi, GBM viene scelto per la valutazione finale.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің ағылшынша Эмози тапсырмасында 2- нің жарым- 2018 жылы қолданылатын жүйемізді таңдайды. Біздің жүйеміз екі бақылау компьютерді үйрену алгоритмдеріне негізделген: Градиентті көтеру регрессиялық бұтақ әдісі (GBM) және екі бағытталған ұзын қысқа уақыт жады желі (BLSTM). Жалпы мүмкіндіктердің сыртқы ресурстардан әртүрлі лексикон мен синтактикалық мүмкіндіктерді тартып шығармыз. Екі алгоритмдің нәтижесін салыстырып, соңғы оқиға үшін GBM таңдалады.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემის გამოყენება ინგლისური ემოგი წინაწერების საქმე 2-ში SemEval-2018-ში. ჩვენი სისტემა ორი მონაცემებული მაქინის სწავლების ალგორიტიმზე დაბაზიან: გრადენტის სწავლად რეგრესის ხე მეტი (GBM) და ორედირექციონალური ძლიერი მეხსიერების ქსელი (BLSTM). ჩვენ განსხვავებული ლექსიკონის და სინტექტიკური ფუნქციების დამატებით გარეშე რესურსებიდან გამოყენებთ. შემდეგ ორი ალგორიტემის შედეგი შემდგომარება, GBM მონიშნულია ბოლო შემდგომარებისთვის.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma mūsų sistema, naudojama anglų Emoji Prediction Task 2 SemEval-2018. Our system is based on two supervised machine learning algorithms: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) and Bidirectional Long Short-term Memory Network (BLSTM).  Be bendrų savybių, iš išorės išteklių išimame įvairius leksikonus ir sintaksinius savybes. Palyginus dviejų algoritmų rezultatus, galutiniam vertinimui pasirenkama GBM.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് എമോജി പ്രിനിഷന്\u200d ടാസ്ക് 2-ല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് വിവര നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ രണ്ട് നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്: ഗ്രേഡിയന്റ് ബുട്രിങ്ങ് റിഗ്രെഷന പൊതുവായ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടാതെ, പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ലെക്സിക്ഷനും സിനിട്ടാക് രണ്ടു ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d തുല്യമാക്കിയശേഷം, അവസാന വിലയ്ക്ക് ജിബിഎം തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ടിര', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna użata fil-Ħidma ta’ Tbassir Ingliż Emoji 2 fis-SemEval-2018. Is-sistema tagħna hija bbażata fuq żewġ algoritmi superviżi tat-tagħlim tal-magni: il-Metodu ta’ Titjib Gradjenti fis-Siġra ta’ Regressjoni (GBM) u n-Netwerk Bidirezzjonali tal-Memorja fuq medda qasira ta’ żmien twil (BLSTM). Minbarra l-karatteristiċi komuni, neħħew diversi karatteristiċi lexicon u sintattiċi minn riżorsi esterni. Wara li jitqabblu r-riżultati ta’ żewġ algoritmi, il-GBM jintgħażel għall-evalwazzjoni finali.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем употребен во англиската Емоја предвидување задача 2 на SemEval-2018. Нашиот систем се базира на два надгледувани алгоритми за машинско учење: Градиентно зголемување на регресниот дрвен метод (ГБМ) и дворочна долгорочна мрежа на меморија (БЛСТМ). Освен заедничките карактеристики, извадуваме различни лексикони и синтактички карактеристики од надворешни ресурси. По споредувањето на резултатите од двата алгоритми, ГБМ е избрана за финалната оценка.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kami digunakan dalam Bahasa Inggeris Emoji Prediction Task 2 di SemEval-2018. Sistem kita berdasarkan dua algoritma pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi: Kaedah Regresi Pembentuk Gradien (GBM) dan Rangkaian Memori Berjangka Panjang Dua Arah (BLSTM). Selain ciri-ciri umum, kami mengekstrak pelbagai leksikon dan ciri-ciri sintaktik dari sumber luar. Selepas membandingkan hasil dua algoritma, GBM dipilih untuk penilaian akhir.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system wykorzystywany w angielskim Emoji Prediction Task 2 na SemEval-2018. Nasz system oparty jest na dwóch nadzorowanych algorytmach uczenia maszynowego: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) oraz dwukierunkowej długoterminowej sieci pamięci krótkoterminowej (BLSTM). Oprócz wspólnych cech ekstraktujemy różne funkcje leksykonowe i składniowe z zewnętrznych zasobów. Po porównaniu wyników dwóch algorytmów do oceny końcowej wybierany jest GBM.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний англи хэлний Эможи хэлэлцээний 2 даалгаварын ажлын системийг SemEval-2018 онд тайлбарладаг. Бидний систем хоёр удирдлагатай машин суралцах алгоритм дээр суурилсан: Градиентын бууруулах мод (GBM) болон хоёр багын богино хугацааны Memory Network (BLSTM). Олон төрлийн чадваруудыг нэмэхэд, бид гадаад нөөц бүтээгдэхүүнээс олон лексикон болон синтактик чадварыг гаргадаг. Хоёр алгоритмын үр дүнг харьцуулсны дараа, GBM сүүлийн оюутнуудад сонгогддог.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt brukt i den engelske Emoji-førehandsvisinga 2 på semiEval-2018. Systemet vårt er basert på to oversikte maskinelæringsalgoritme: Gradientbrukingstråmetode (GBM) og to retning på langsiktig minnettverk (BLSTM). I tillegg til felles funksjonar ekstraherer vi ulike leksikon og syntaktiske funksjonar frå eksterne ressursar. Etter å samanlikna resultatet av to algoritme, blir GBM valt for det siste evalueringa.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru utilizat în limba engleză Emoji Prediction Task 2 la SemEval-2018. Sistemul nostru se bazează pe doi algoritmi supravegheați de învățare automată: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) și Bidirecțional Long-Term Memory Network (BLSTM). Pe lângă caracteristicile comune, extragem diverse caracteristici lexiconice și sintactice din resurse externe. După compararea rezultatelor a doi algoritmi, GBM este ales pentru evaluarea finală.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem koji se koristi na engleskom emisijskom predviđanju zadatku 2 na pola Evala-2018. Naš sistem je zasnovan na dva algoritma nadziranog mašinskog učenja: metod za povećanje gradjanata regresije drveta (GBM) i dvosmjernu dugoročnu mrežu memorije (BLSTM). Osim zajedničkih karakteristika, izvlačimo različite leksikone i sintaktičke karakteristike iz vanjskih resursa. Nakon usporedbe rezultata dva algoritma, GBM je izabran za konačnu procjenu.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය භාවිතා කරලා ඉංග්\u200dරීසි එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩ 2ක් විස්තර කරනවා සම්වේල් 2018 වල. අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණා කරපු පද්ධතිය අල්ගෝරිතම් දෙකක් අධාරණය කරනවා: ග්\u200dරේඩියන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විද්\u200dයාවය (GBM) සහ දෙවිද්\u200dයාවක් ල සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් වගේම, අපි විවිධ ලෙක්සිකෝන් සහ සංකේතික විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන්  ඇල්ගෝරිතම් දෙකක් ගැන ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සම්බන්ධ කරපු පස්සේ, GBM අවසාන විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා තෝරණය ක', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa nidaamka uu ku isticmaalayo qasabka ka hortaga Ingiriiska Emoji ee SemEval-2018. Systemkaygu wuxuu ku saleysan yahay laba maamul oo maamul ah oo lagu barto algorithm: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree (GBM) iyo Bidirectional Long Short term Memory Network (BLSTM). Waxyaabaha caadiga ah oo aan ka sokeyn, waxaynu ka soo bixinaa alaab kale oo la xiriira la xiriiro iyo iskutaarin ah oo ka mid ah rasmiga dibadda. Isbardhigidda labada algorithm kadib waxaa loo doortaa GBM qiimeynta ugu dambeysa.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system som används i den engelska Emoji Prediction Task 2 på SemEval-2018. Vårt system bygger på två övervakade algoritmer för maskininlärning: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) och Bidirectional Long Short-Term Memory Network (BLSTM). Förutom de gemensamma funktionerna extraherar vi olika lexikon och syntaktiska funktioner från externa resurser. Efter att ha jämfört resultaten av två algoritmer väljs GBM för den slutliga utvärderingen.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் SemEval-2018 ஆங்கிலத்தில் எங்கள் அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட எமோஜி முன்னாட்சி பணியில் 2 பயன்படுத்தப் எங்கள் அமைப்பு இரண்டு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட இயந்திரத்தை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் முறைமையில் அடிப்படையாக இருக்கிறது: சரியான புதுப்பித்தல் கட்டுப்பாடு முறைம பொதுவான தன்மைகளை தவிர, நாம் வெளி வளங்களில் இருந்து பல லெக்சிகோன் மற்றும் ஒத்திசைக்குறிப்புகளை வெளியேற இரண்டு ஆல்பிரிக்குகளின் முடிவுகளை ஒப்பிடும் பிறகு, கடைசி evaluation க்கு GBM தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்டது.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری سیسٹم کو انگلیسی ایموجی پیش بینی ٹاکس 2 میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے۔ ہمارا سیستم دو موجود ماشین یادگیری الگوریتم پر بنیاد ہے: گریڈینٹ بوسینگ ریگرس درخت کا طریقہ (GBM) اور دودہانی لانگی لنگ مہمانی نیٹورک (BLSTM). ہم مختلف لکسیکن اور سینٹکتیک ویٹیوں کو بیرون رسورسوں سے نکالتے ہیں۔ دو الگوریتم کا نتیجہ مقایسہ کرنے کے بعد GBM آخری ارزیابی کے لئے انتخاب کیا جاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval-2018'da inglizcha Emoji Diqqat Vazifani 2'da ishlatilgan tizimmizni anglatadi. Bizning tizimmiz ikkita taʼminlovchi kompyuterni o'rganish algorithiga asoslangan: Gradient Boostinging Regression Tree Method (GBM) va Bidirectional Short term xotira tarmoq (BLSTM). Besides the common features, we extract various lexicon and syntactic features from external resources.  Ikki algoritning natijalarini kamaytirishdan keyin GBM oxirgi qiymatga tanlang.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống của chúng ta sử dụng trong Nhiệm vụ Dự đoán Emoji 2 tại Semal-thẩm 8. Hệ thống của chúng tôi dựa trên hai thuật toán giám sát học máy: Bước nâng bậc bậc bậc bậc bậc bậc bậc bậc bậc bậc cây (GBM) và Bidirection Long-term Memory Network (STM). Ngoài các tính chất phổ biến, chúng tôi trích xuất nhiều ngôn ngữ và cấu tạo từ các nguồn ngoại giao. Sau khi so sánh kết quả của hai thuật toán, GBM được chọn cho lần đánh giá cuối cùng.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system, der anvendes i den engelske Emoji Prediction Task 2 på SemEval-2018. Vores system er baseret på to overvågede maskinlæringsalgoritmer: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) og Bidirectional Long Short-Term Memory Network (BLSTM). Udover de fælles funktioner udtrækker vi forskellige leksikon og syntaktiske funktioner fra eksterne ressourcer. Efter sammenligning af resultaterne af to algoritmer vælges GBM til den endelige evaluering.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата система, използвана в английската задача за прогнозиране на емоджи 2 на СемЕвал-2018. Нашата система се основава на два контролирани алгоритма за машинно обучение: Метод за повишаване на регресията на градиента (ГБМ) и двупосочна дългосрочна краткосрочна памет (МБММ). Освен общите характеристики, извличаме различни лексиконни и синтактични характеристики от външни ресурси. След сравняване на резултатите от два алгоритма се избира ГБМ за окончателна оценка.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft ons systeem gebruikt in de Engelse Emoji Prediction Task 2 op de SemEval-2018. Ons systeem is gebaseerd op twee begeleide machine learning algoritmes: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) en Bidirectioneel Long Short-Term Memory Network (BLSTM). Naast de gemeenschappelijke kenmerken, extraheren we verschillende lexicon en syntactische kenmerken uit externe bronnen. Na vergelijking van de resultaten van twee algoritmes wordt GBM gekozen voor de uiteindelijke evaluatie.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav koji se koristi na engleskom emisijskom predviđanju zadatku 2 na pola Evala-2018. Naš sustav se temelji na dva algoritma nadzornog učenja strojeva: metoda za povećanje gradjanta regresije drveta (GBM) i dvosmjerno dugoročne mreže uspomene (BLSTM). Osim zajedničkih karakteristika, izvlačimo različite leksikone i sintaktičke karakteristike iz vanjskih resursa. Nakon usporedbe rezultata dva algoritma, GBM je izabran za konačnu procjenu.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem kita yang digunakan dalam Bahasa Inggris Emoji Prediction Task 2 di SemEval-2018. Sistem kami berdasarkan dua algoritma pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) dan Bidirectional Long-term Memory Network (BLSTM). Selain ciri-ciri umum, kami mengekstrak berbagai ciri-ciri leksikon dan sintaksi dari sumber daya luar. Setelah membandingkan hasil dari dua algoritma, GBM dipilih untuk evaluasi akhir.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser System, das in der englischen Emoji Prediction Task 2 auf der SemEval-2018 verwendet wird. Unser System basiert auf zwei überwachten Algorithmen des maschinellen Lernens: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) und Bidirektional Long Short-Term Memory Network (BLSTM). Neben den gemeinsamen Merkmalen extrahieren wir verschiedene lexikon- und syntaktische Merkmale aus externen Ressourcen. Nach dem Vergleich der Ergebnisse zweier Algorithmen wird GBM für die abschließende Auswertung ausgewählt.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را توصیف می\u200cکند که در ماموریت پیش\u200cبینی ایموزی ۲ در نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ استفاده شده است. سیستم ما بر روی دو الگوریتم یادگیری ماشین تحت نظر قرار گرفته است: روش درخت درخت تغییر گرادینت (GBM) و شبکه حافظه کوتاه طولانی دورانی (BLSTM). علاوه بر ویژه های مشترک، ما ویژه های مختلف لکسیون و سنتاکتیک را از منابع خارجی خارج می کنیم. بعد از مقایسه نتایج دو الگوریتم، GBM برای ارزیابی نهایی انتخاب می شود.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 2018년SemEval-18 영어 표정 예측 임무2에서 사용한 시스템을 소개한다.우리 시스템은 두 가지 감독이 있는 기계 학습 알고리즘을 바탕으로 한다. 그것이 바로 사다리꼴 추진 회귀 트리 방법(GBM)과 양방향 장단시 기억 네트워크(BLSTM)이다.공통된 특징을 제외하고 우리는 외부 자원에서 각종 어휘와 문법 특징을 추출한다.두 가지 알고리즘의 결과를 비교한 후 GBM을 선택하여 최종 평가를 실시한다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz biziň iňlisçe Emoji Öňünden 2-nji Görevimizi SemEval-2018'de ulanýan sistemimizi tassyýar. Biziň sistemimiz iki gözlemli maşynyň öwrenmesi algoritmyna daýrylýar: Gradiýat gaýşartma Treei (GBM) we iki görnöş Uzun Ýaky Aýry Aýry (BLSTM). Däşer çeşmelerden beýleki lezikon we sintaktik karakterlerden çykarýarys. Iki algoritmyň netijesini karşılaşdyrylandan soňra, GBM soňky çykyş üçin saýlandy.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu uliotumika katika Task 2 ya Udhibiti wa Kiingereza Emoji kwenye SemEval-2018. Mfumo wetu unategemea mifululizo miwili inayofuatiliwa na mashine ya kujifunza: Utawala wa Udhibiti wa Udhibiti wa Gradient Boosting Tree (GBM) na Mtandao wa Kumbukumbu kwa muda mrefu (BLSTM). Pamoja na vipengele vya kawaida, tunatoa sifa mbalimbali za lexico na pamoja kutoka rasilimali za nje. Baada ya kulinganisha matokeo ya algorithi mbili, GBM imechaguliwa kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa mwisho.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan sistemin tonë të përdorur në detyrën e parashikimit të Emoji 2 në SemEval-2018. Sistemi ynë është mbështetur në dy algoritme të mbikqyrura për mësimin e makinave: Metoda e rritjes së gradientit të regresionit të drurit (GBM) dhe Rrjeti i kujtesës së afatit të shkurtër (BLSTM). Përveç karakteristikave të përbashkëta, ne nxjerrim karakteristika të ndryshme lexikone dhe sintaktike nga burimet e jashtme. Pas krahasimit të rezultateve të dy algoritmeve, GBM zgjedhet për vlerësimin përfundimtar.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በይንግሊዝኛ ኢሜጂ ግዛት ስራ 2 ላይ በSemEval-2018 የተጠቃሚ ስርዓታችንን ይናገራል፡፡ ስርዓታችን በሁለት የተጠበቀው መሣሪያዎች መማር አልgorithms ላይ በመሠረት ነው፤ የግራያዊ ቡቲንግ መዝገብ ዛፍ (GBM) እና የሁለተኛ ረጅም ቆራጭ ማስታወሻ መረብ (BLSTM). ከውጭ ሀብት የተለየ የሊክሲን እና የስናታዊ ምርጫዎችን እናወጣለን፡፡ የሁለቱን አሌጎርቲም ፍሬዎችን ካስተካከሉ በኋላ የGBM መጨረሻውን አረጋገጥ ይመረጣል።', 'af': 'Hierdie papier beskrywe ons stelsel gebruik in die Engelse Emoji Voorskou Opdrag 2 by die SemEval-2018. Ons stelsel is gebaseer op twee ondersoekte masjien leer algoritme: Gradiënt Boom Regresjong Metode (GBM) en tweederigting Lang- term Geheue Netwerk (BLSTM). Ons uitpak verskillende leksikone en sintaktika funksies van eksterne hulpbronne. Na vergelyking van die resultate van twee algoritme, word GBM gekies vir die eindelike evaluasie.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim İngilizə Emoji Prediction Task 2-ində istifadə edilən sistemimizi semiEval-2018-də təsdiqləyir. Sistemimiz iki nəzarət edilmiş maşın öyrənməsi algoritmi: Gradient Increasing Regression Tree Method (GBM) və iki tərəfdən Uzun Qısqa Yadın Ağı (BLSTM). Ortaq xüsusiyyətlər istisna olmaqla, biz müxtəlif leksikon və sintaktik xüsusiyyətlərdən çıxarırıq. İki algoritmin sonuçlarını saldıqdan sonra, GBM son değerlendirmək üçün seçildi.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা আমাদের ব্যবস্থা ইংরেজী ইমোজি প্রেকশন কাজে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে সেমইভাল-২০১৮ এ। আমাদের সিস্টেম দুটি পর্যবেক্ষিত মেশিন শিক্ষা অ্যালগরিদমের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে: গ্রেডিয়েন্ট বুসিং রেগ্রেশন গাছের মাধ্যম (জিবিএম) এবং বাইডেডিয় সাধারণ বৈশিষ্ট্য ছাড়া, আমরা বাইরের সম্পদ থেকে বিভিন্ন লেক্সিকোন এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য বিষয়বস্তু ব দুই অ্যালগরিদমের ফলাফল তুলনা করার পর জিবিএম চূড়ান্ত মূল্যের জন্য নির্বাচিত হয়েছে।', 'hy': "Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգը, որը օգտագործվել է Անգլերենի Էմոյի կանխատեսման 2-ի հանձնարարում' 2018 թվականին: Մեր համակարգը հիմնված է երկու վերահսկված մեքենայի ուսումնասիրության ալգորիթմի վրա' ԳԲՄ և երկու ուղղությամբ երկարաժամկետ հիշողության ցանցի վրա: Բացի ընդհանուր հատկություններից, մենք արտաքին ռեսուրսներից բազմաթիվ լեքսիկոն և սինտակտիկ հատկություններ ենք հանում: Երկու ալգորիթմների արդյունքները համեմատելուց հետո ԳԲՄ-ն ընտրվում է վերջնական գնահատման համար:", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem koji se koristi na engleskom emisijskom predviđanju zadatku 2 na pola Evala-2018. Naš sistem se temelji na dva algoritma nadzornog učenja mašine: metod za povećanje gradjanta regresije drveta (GBM) i dvosmjernu dugoročnu Memorijsku mrežu (BLSTM). Osim zajedničkih karakteristika, izvlačimo različite leksikone i sintaktičke karakteristike iz vanjskih resursa. Nakon usporedbe rezultata dva algoritma, GBM je izabran za konačnu procjenu.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema utilitzat a la tasca 2 de predicció d'Emoji anglesa al SemEval-2018. El nostre sistema es basa en dos algoritmes d'aprenentatge màquinari supervisads: Métode de Regressió Gradient Boosting (GBM) i Rede Bidireccional de Memoria a Curt termini (BLSTM). A més de les característiques comunes, extreuem diverses característiques lexicòniques i sinàctiques dels recursos externs. Després de comparar els resultats de dos algoritmes, es selecciona GBM per a l'evaluació final.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém používaný v anglickém Emoji Prediction Task 2 na SemEval-2018. Náš systém je založen na dvou algoritmech strojového učení: metodě Gradient Boosting Regression Tree (GBM) a obousměrné síti krátkodobé paměti (BLSTM). Kromě běžných vlastností extrahujeme různé lexikonové a syntaktické vlastnosti z externích zdrojů. Po porovnání výsledků dvou algoritmů je pro závěrečné vyhodnocení vybrán GBM.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi, mida kasutatakse SemEval-2018 inglise emoji ennustamise ülesandes 2. Meie süsteem põhineb kahel juhitaval masinõppe algoritmil: gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) ja kahesuunaline pikaajaline lühiajaline mäluvõrk (BLSTM). Lisaks ühistele omadustele ekstraheerime välisressurssidest erinevaid leksikoni- ja süntaktilisi omadusi. Pärast kahe algoritmi tulemuste võrdlemist valitakse lõpphindamiseks GBM.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval-2018:n englanninkielisessä emoji-ennustetehtävässä käytettyä järjestelmäämme. Järjestelmämme perustuu kahteen valvottuun koneoppimisalgoritmiin: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) ja Bidirectional Long Short-Term Memory Network (BLSTM). Yhteisten ominaisuuksien lisäksi poimimme erilaisia sanastoja ja syntaktisia ominaisuuksia ulkoisista resursseista. Kahden algoritmin tulosten vertailun jälkeen GBM valitaan lopulliseen arviointiin.', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah iki rambaran sistem dhéwé nggambar Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan Inggris emuji Taaksi 2 nang semi-2008. System Tanggal ono langkung dibungano sing dibungano, kita butuh-butuh luwih karo akeh "letik" lan "sengatik" Defs', 'ha': "This paper describes our system used in the English Emoji Prediction Task 2 at the SemEval-2018.  @ item: inmenu Text Completion Babu masu amfani da ɗayan jama'a, Munã fitar masu wasu miski na leksisi da syntactic daga mataifan bakwai. Babu sami matsala biyu na algoritun, an zãɓi GBM wa ƙarshen qiimako.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem, ki ga uporabljamo v angleški nalogi napovedovanja emojev 2 na SemEval-2018. Naš sistem temelji na dveh nadzorovanih algoritmih strojnega učenja: metoda regresijskega drevesa (GBM) in dvosmerno dolgoročno kratkoročno pomnilniško omrežje (BLSTM). Poleg skupnih značilnosti iz zunanjih virov izvlečemo različne leksikonske in sintaktične značilnosti. Po primerjavi rezultatov dveh algoritmov se za končno oceno izbere GBM.', 'he': "העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו המשתמשת במשימת הקיפוש האמוג'י האנגלית 2 בסמיוול-2018. המערכת שלנו מבוססת על שני אלגוריתמים של למידת מכונות שמבוטחים: שיטת גידול גרסיינטי עץ (Gradient Boosting Tree, GBM) ורשת זיכרון ארוכה במרחק שני כיוונים (BLSTM). חוץ מהתכונות המשותפים, אנו מוציאים תכונות מלקסיקונים וסינטקטיקים שונים ממשאבים חיצוניים. לאחר שיווה את תוצאות שני אלגוריתמים, GBM נבחר להערכה הסופית.", 'bo': 'ཤོག Our system is based on two supervised machine learning algorithms: Gradient Boosting Regression Tree Method (GBM) and Bidirectional Long-term Memory Network (BLSTM). Besides the common features, we extract various lexicon and syntactic features from external resources. གྲངས་སྒྲིག་རིམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་མཉམ་བཟོ་བ་རྗེས་ནི།'}
{'en': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'ar': 'UMDSub في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات شبكة عصبية تلافيفية متعددة القنوات على تضمين الكلمات الفرعية', 'fr': "UMDSub à SemEval-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Réseau neuronal convolutif multicanal de prédiction d'emoji multilingue sur l'intégration de sous-mots", 'pt': 'UMDSub na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Previsão de emojis multilíngues Rede neural convolucional multicanal na incorporação de subpalavras', 'es': 'UMDsub en SemeVal-2018 Tarea 2: Predicción multilingüe de emojis Red neuronal convolucional multicanal en la incrustación de subpalabras', 'ja': 'UMDSub at SemEval -2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi - Channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'zh': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 务 2:子词嵌上多言表情符号占多通道卷积神经网络', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर UMDSub: बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी बहु-चैनल Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क सबवर्ड एम्बेडिंग पर', 'ru': 'UMDSub на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи Многоканальная сверточная нейронная сеть по внедрению подслова', 'ga': 'UMDSub ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Ilteangach Emoji Prediction Líonra Néarrach Comhtháite Ilchainéil ar Leabú Fofhocal', 'hu': 'UMDSub a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Többnyelvű emoji előrejelzés Többcsatornás konvuluációs neurális hálózat az alszó beágyazásán', 'ka': 'UMDSub SemEval-2018 დავალება 2: მრავალენგური Emoji წარმოდგენება მრავალური კანალური ნეიროლური ქსელი სამუშაო წარმოდგენებაზე', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη Πολυκαναλιού Νευρικού Δικτύου για την ενσωμάτωση Υπολέξεων', 'mk': 'UMDSub на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Мултијазична емојска предвидба Мултиканална конволуционална неурална мрежа за вградување на подзборови', 'lt': 'UMDSub puslapyje 2018 m. 2 užduotis: daugiakalbis Emoji Prediction daugiakanelis konvolucinis neurologinis tinklas', 'it': "UMDSub a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Prediczione Emoji Multilinguale Rete Neurale Convoluzionale multicanale sull'Embedding di Subword", 'kk': 'UMDSub 2- талық тапсырма 2- дегі UMEval- 2018 тапсырмасы: Көптілік эмози көпшілікті көп- арналық көпшілік нейралық желіName', 'ms': 'UMDSub di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa Rangkaian Neural Berbahasa Berbahasa pada Penjelmaan Subkata', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: അധിക ഭാഷ എമോജി പ്രിന്\u200dടിക്ഷന്\u200d Multi- Channel Convolution Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'mt': 'UMDSub f’SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'mn': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'no': 'UMDSub på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2: Multispråk Emoji- forhåndsvising Multikanal Konvolusjonell Neuralnettverk på underordinnbygging', 'pl': 'UMDSub na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Wielojęzyczna Prognoza Emoji Wielokanałowa Konwolucyjna Sieć Neuralna na temat osadzania podsłów', 'ro': 'UMDSub la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Predicția emoji multilingvă Rețeaua neurală convoluțională multicanale pe încorporarea subcuvintelor', 'sr': 'UMDSub na semiEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'si': 'UMDSubi at semeval-2018 Job 2: Multilanguage Emotion', 'so': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Didiction of luuqado badan Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolution Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 2: பல மொழி எமோயி முன்னாட்சி Multi- channel Convolution Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'sv': 'UMDSub på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Flerspråkig Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Konvulutionell Neural Network på Subword Embedding', 'ur': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'uz': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'vi': 'Trung tâm vận chuyển tâm thần liên kết với mật khẩu', 'hr': 'UMDSub na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Предвиждане на многоезични емоджи Многоканална конвелуционна неврална мрежа за вграждане на поддуми', 'nl': 'UMDSub bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Meertalige Emoji Voorspelling Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network op Subword Embedding', 'da': 'UMDSub på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Flersproget emoji forudsigelse Multi-channel konvulutivt neural netværk på underordsindlejring', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 2: 다중 언어 표정 예측 서브단어에 삽입된 다중 채널 볼륨 신경 네트워크', 'id': 'UMDSub di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'de': 'UMDSub bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Mehrsprachige Emoji-Vorhersage Mehrkanaliges Convolutional Neural Network auf Subword Embedding', 'fa': 'UMDSub در تابع ۲۰۱۸: پیش\u200cبینی Emoji Multi-Channel Multi-Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'sw': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'sq': 'UMDSub në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'am': 'ስራ 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolution Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'tr': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'af': 'UMDSub by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Multilingual Emoji Voorskou Multikanaal Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerk op Subwoord Inbetering', 'az': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: সাবওয়ার্ড এমবেডিং নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'UMDSub na semiEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'ca': 'UMDSub a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'hy': 'Ő„Ő„DSubComment', 'et': 'UMDSub SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: mitmekeelne emoji ennustamine mitmekanaliline konvolutsiooniline neurovõrk alamsõna põimimisel', 'fi': 'UMDSub SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 2: Monikielinen emoji-ennuste Monikanavainen konvolutionaalinen hermoverkosto alasanojen upotuksessa', 'cs': 'UMDSub na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Vícejazyčná předpověď emoji Vícekanálová konveluční neuronová síť na vložení podslov', 'jv': 'ummdsb at semiinval-2008 task 2: Multilanguage emuji predikion Multi-channel convolution Neral Network on Subword embedding', 'sk': 'UMDSub na SemEval-2018 2. naloga: Večjezična napoved emojijev Večkanalna konvolucijska živčna mreža na vdelavi podbesed', 'ha': 'Sub on SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 2: multilinguin Emoji Prediction multipl-Channel Conversation Neural Networkspace on Subword Emblending', 'he': 'UMDSub ב SemEval-2018 משימה 2: Prediction Multilingual Emoji Multi-Channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding', 'bo': 'UMDSub at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network on Subword Embedding'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the UMDSub system that participated in Task 2 of SemEval-2018. We developed a system that predicts an emoji given the raw text in a English tweet. The system is a Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network based on subword embeddings for the representation of tweets. This model improves on character or word based methods by about 2 %. Our system placed 21st of 48 participating systems in the official evaluation.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema UMDsub que participó en la Tarea 2 de SemEval-2018. Desarrollamos un sistema que predice un emoji dado el texto sin procesar de un tweet en inglés. El sistema es una red neuronal convolucional multicanal basada en incrustaciones de subpalabras para la representación de tuits. Este modelo mejora los métodos basados en caracteres o palabras en aproximadamente un 2%. Nuestro sistema colocó en el puesto 21 de los 48 sistemas participantes en la evaluación oficial.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام UMDSub الذي شارك في المهمة 2 من SemEval-2018. لقد طورنا نظامًا يتنبأ بإيموجي بالنظر إلى النص الخام في تغريدة باللغة الإنجليزية. النظام عبارة عن شبكة عصبية تلافيفية متعددة القنوات تعتمد على تضمين الكلمات الفرعية لتمثيل التغريدات. يعمل هذا النموذج على تحسين الأساليب القائمة على الأحرف أو الكلمات بنسبة 2٪ تقريبًا. وضع نظامنا المركز الحادي والعشرين من بين 48 نظامًا مشاركًا في التقييم الرسمي.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema UMDSub que participou da Tarefa 2 do SemEval-2018. Desenvolvemos um sistema que prevê um emoji dado o texto bruto em um tweet em inglês. O sistema é uma Rede Neural Convolucional Multicanal baseada em embeddings de subpalavras para a representação de tweets. Este modelo melhora os métodos baseados em caracteres ou palavras em cerca de 2%. Nosso sistema ficou em 21º dos 48 sistemas participantes na avaliação oficial.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système UMDSub qui a participé à la tâche 2 de SemEval-2018. Nous avons développé un système qui permet de prédire un emoji en fonction du texte brut d'un tweet en anglais. Le système est un réseau de neurones convolutifs multicanaux basé sur l'intégration de sous-mots pour la représentation des tweets. Ce modèle améliore les méthodes basées sur des caractères ou des mots d'environ 2\xa0%. Notre système s'est classé au 21e rang des 48 systèmes participants dans l'évaluation officielle.", 'ja': '本稿では， SemEval -2018のTask 2に参加したUMDSubシステムについて述べる。生のテキストを英語のツイートで絵文字を予測するシステムを開発しました。このシステムは、ツイートの表現のためのサブワード埋め込みに基づくマルチチャネル畳み込みニューラルネットワークです。このモデルは、文字または単語ベースの方法で約2%向上します。当社のシステムは、公式評価に参加した48のシステムのうち21番目に位置付けられました。', 'zh': '本文言预SemEval-2018务2者UMDSub统。 开一统,以英语推本占表情符号。 统者,子词嵌之多通道卷积神经网络,所以示推文也。 此模在字符或单词之法改入约 2%。 我们的系统在官方评估中将48个参统中的第21个在第21位。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर UMDSub सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जिसने SemEval-2018 के कार्य 2 में भाग लिया था। हमने एक ऐसी प्रणाली विकसित की है जो एक अंग्रेजी ट्वीट में कच्चे पाठ को देखते हुए एक इमोजी की भविष्यवाणी करती है। सिस्टम एक बहु-चैनल Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क tweets के प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए subword embeddings पर आधारित है. यह मॉडल चरित्र या शब्द आधारित विधियों पर लगभग 2% तक सुधार करता है। हमारे सिस्टम ने आधिकारिक मूल्यांकन में 48 भाग लेने वाली प्रणालियों में से 21 को रखा।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе описывается система UMDSub, которая участвовала в Задаче 2 SemEval-2018. Мы разработали систему, которая предсказывает эмодзи, учитывая необработанный текст в английском твите. Система представляет собой многоканальную сверточную нейронную сеть, основанную на вложениях подслова для представления твитов. Эта модель улучшает методы на основе символов или слов примерно на 2%. Наша система включила 21-е место из 48 участвующих систем в официальную оценку.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras UMDSub a ghlac páirt i dTasc 2 de SemEval-2018. D’fhorbraíomar córas a thuar emoji i bhfianaise an téacs amh i dtvuít Béarla. Is Líonra Néarrach Róinmhínithe Ilchainéil é an córas atá bunaithe ar leabú fofhocail chun tweets a léiriú. Feabhsaítear an tsamhail seo ar mhodhanna atá bunaithe ar charachtair nó ar fhocail thart ar 2%. Chuir ár gcóras 21 as 48 córas rannpháirteach sa mheastóireacht oifigiúil.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი UMDSub სისტემის გამოსახულება, რომელიც SemEval-2018-ის 2. რამდენი დაწყება. ჩვენ განვითარებეთ სისტემა, რომელიც ემოჯიას გადაწყვეტა, რომელიც ინგლისური ტექსტის გადაწყვეტა. Name ეს მოდელი 2%-ის გამოსახულება სიტყვების ან სიტყვების მეტოვებზე. ჩვენი სისტემმა 48-ის 21მე დაფარდებული სისტემებში დააყენეთ.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 2. feladatában részt vevő UMDSub rendszert. Kifejlesztettünk egy olyan rendszert, amely előrejelzi az emojit, tekintettel a nyers szövegre egy angol tweetben. A rendszer egy többcsatornás konvolúciós ideghálózat, amely alszóbeágyazásokon alapul a tweetek ábrázolására. Ez a modell körülbelül 2%-kal javul a karakter- vagy szóalapú módszereken. Rendszerünk 48 résztvevő rendszer közül 21-et helyezett el a hivatalos értékelésben.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που συμμετείχε στην εργασία 2 του SemEval-2018. Αναπτύξαμε ένα σύστημα που προβλέπει ένα emoji δεδομένου του ακατέργαστου κειμένου σε ένα αγγλικό tweet. Το σύστημα είναι ένα Πολυκαναλικό Νευρικό Δίκτυο που βασίζεται σε ενσωμάτωση υπολέξεων για την αναπαράσταση των tweets. Αυτό το μοντέλο βελτιώνεται στις μεθόδους που βασίζονται σε χαρακτήρες ή λέξεις κατά περίπου 2%. Το σύστημά μας τοποθέτησε 21α από 48 συμμετέχοντα συστήματα στην επίσημη αξιολόγηση.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive il sistema UMDSub che ha partecipato al Task 2 di SemEval-2018. Abbiamo sviluppato un sistema che prevede un emoji dato il testo grezzo in un tweet inglese. Il sistema è una Rete Neurale Convoluzionale multicanale basata su incorporazioni di sottoparole per la rappresentazione di tweet. Questo modello migliora i metodi basati su caratteri o parole di circa il 2%. Il nostro sistema ha inserito il 21° dei 48 sistemi partecipanti nella valutazione ufficiale.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2- тапсырмасында қатысу үшін UMDSub жүйесін таңдайды. Біз ағылшын тійтіндегі мәтінді көңіл мәтінді таңдайтын emoji жүйесін жасадық. Бұл жүйе tweets- тізбектерін көрсету үшін ішкі сөздерді ендіруде негізделген көп- арналық конверсиялық неврал желі. Бұл үлгі таңбаларды не сөздерді негіздеген әдістерді 2% деп жақсартады. Біздің жүйеміз 48-ның 21-інші қатысушылық жүйелерді официалдық оқиғанда орналастырды.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2 ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന UMDSub സിസ്റ്റത്തെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൈറ്റില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുള്ള ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടെക്സ ഈ സിസ്റ്റം ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി സബ്വോര്\u200dഡ് അംഗീകരിക്കുന്നതിന് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു പല- ചാനല്\u200d കോ ഈ മോഡല്\u200d 2 ശതമാനം കൊണ്ട് അക്ഷരത്തിലോ വാക്കിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലോ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 48-ല്\u200d പങ്കെടുക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ 21-ല്\u200d പങ്കാളികള്\u200d ഓഫിക്കല്\u200d വ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema UMDSub li pparteċipat fil-Kompitu 2 ta’ SemEval-2018. Żviluppajna sistema li tipprevedi emoji mogħtija t-test mhux ipproċessat f’tweet Ingliż. Is-sistema hija Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali Multikanali bbażat fuq inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ sottokliem għar-rappreżentazzjoni ta’ tweets. Dan il-mudell itejjeb b’madwar 2 % il-metodi bbażati fuq il-karattru jew il-kliem. Is-sistema tagħna poġġiet il-21 minn 48 sistema parteċipanti fl-evalwazzjoni uffiċjali.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-2018 оны 2-р ажил дээр оролцсон UMDSub системийг тайлбарладаг. Бид англи tweet дээр эможийг таамагладаг системийг хөгжүүлсэн. Энэ систем бол tweets-ын төлөөлөвлөгөө дээр суб-үгийг нэвтрүүлэх олон арга замын мэдрэлийн сүлжээ юм. Энэ загвар нь харьцаа эсвэл үг үндсэн аргыг 2%-аар сайжруулдаг. Бидний систем 48-ын 21-р оролцогчдын системийг официйн шалгалт дээр оруулсан.', 'ms': 'This paper describes the UMDSub system that participated in Task 2 of SemEval-2018.  Kami mengembangkan sistem yang meramalkan emoji yang diberikan teks mentah dalam tweet Inggeris. The system is a Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network based on subword embeddings for the representation of tweets.  This model improves on character or word based methods by about 2%.  Our system placed 21st of 48 participating systems in the official evaluation.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот UMDSub кој учествуваше во задачата 2 на SemEval-2018. Развивме систем кој предвидува емоџи дадени на суровиот текст на англиски твит. Системот е мултиканална конволуционална невројална мрежа базирана на внесувања на подзборови за претставување на твитови. Овој модел се подобрува на методите базирани на знаци или зборови за околу 2 отсто. Нашиот систем стави 21 од 48 учествувачки системи во официјалната проценка.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver UMDSub-systemet som delta i oppgåve 2 av semiEval-2018. Vi utvikla eit system som forventar ein emoji gitt råteksten i ein engelsk tweet. Systemet er ein fleire kanalar konvolusjonell neiralnettverk basert på underordinnbøyingar for representasjonen av tweets. Denne modellen forbetrar på teikn eller ordbaserte metodar med omtrent 2%. Sistemet vårt plassert 21. av 48 deltakende systemer i den offisielle evalueringa.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano system UMDSub, który uczestniczył w zadaniu 2 SemEval-2018. Opracowaliśmy system, który przewiduje emoji biorąc pod uwagę surowy tekst w angielskim tweecie. System jest wielokanałową Konwolucyjną Siecią Neuralną opartą na osadzeniach podsłów do reprezentacji tweetów. Model ten poprawia metody oparte na znakach lub słowach o około 2%. Nasz system umieścił XXI z 48 systemów uczestniczących w oficjalnej ocenie.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem UMDSub koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 2 od semiEvala-2018. Razvili smo sistem koji predviđa emoji koji je dao sirov tekst u engleskom tweetu. Sistem je višekanalna konvolucionalna Neuralna mreža, zasnovana na podriječjim integracijama za predstavljanje tweeta. Ovaj model se poboljšava na karakterima ili metodama temeljenih na reèima oko 2%. Naš sistem je postavio 21 od 48 sustava sudjelovanja u službenoj procjeni.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka UMDSub ee ka qayb galay shaqada 2 ee SemEval-2018. Waxaan horumarinnay nidaam ka sii sheegaya emoji, kaas oo warqada dhaqdhaqaaqa ee Ingiriis ku qoran. Isticmaalku waa shabakadda Neural ee ku saabsan qoraalka hoose-word ee loo soo bandhigayo tweetka. Tusaaladan wuxuu ku korodhsadaa xaraf ama qaabab ku saleysan hadal ku qoran qiyaastii 2 boqolkiiba. Systemkanagu wuxuu ka dhigay 21aad oo 48 ka mid ah nidaamka qayb-qayb-gelinta rasmiga ah.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩේ දෙවෙනි වැඩේ සම්වේල් 2 වැඩේ සම්වේල් පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා. අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ටුයිට් වලින් පිළිබඳ පැත්තක් දෙන්නේ එමෝජි වලින් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් විස් පද්ධතිය තමයි බොහොමවචානල් සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා බොහොමවචානල් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා විශේෂය සම මේ මොඩල් අක්ෂර නැත්තම් වචනය අධාරිත විදිහට 2% විතරයි. අපේ පද්ධතිය 21වෙනි පද්ධතියක් අධාරික විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් පාලනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver UMDSub-systemet som deltog i uppgift 2 i SemEval-2018. Vi utvecklade ett system som förutspår en emoji med tanke på råtexten i en engelsk tweet. Systemet är ett Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network baserat på underord inbäddningar för representation av tweets. Denna modell förbättrar tecken- eller ordbaserade metoder med cirka 2%. Vårt system placerade 21:a av 48 deltagande system i den officiella utvärderingen.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval- 2018ல் பணியில் பகிர்ந்த UMDSub அமைப்பை விளக்குகிறது. நாங்கள் ஒரு அமைப்பை உருவாக்கினோம். ஒரு ஆங்கிலத்தின் தொடர்பில் ஒரு உணர்ச்சி கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உரையில் கொட The system is a Multi- channel Convolution Neural Network based on subword embeddings for the representation of tweets. இந்த மாதிரி எழுத்து அல்லது வார்த்தை அடிப்படையில் முன்னேறுகிறது 2%. எங்கள் அமைப்பு 48 பகிர்ந்து கொள்ளும் அமைப்புகளில் 21 ஆறுதலை அரசியல் மதிப்பில் வைத்தது.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ نے UMDSub سیسٹم کی توصیف دی ہے جس نے SemEval-2018 کی ٹاکس 2 میں شریک کیا ہے. ہم نے ایک سیسٹم ایموجی کو پیش بینی کرتا ہے جو انگلیسی ٹویٹ میں روا لکھا گیا ہے۔ سیسٹم ٹویٹوں کی نمایش کے لئے زیربورڈ ایمبڈینگ پر بنیاد رکھی ہوئی ایک مثال-چانال کنویرول نیورال نیٹ ورک ہے. یہ موڈل شخص یا کلمات کی بنیاد کی طریقے 2% کے ذریعہ سفارش کرتا ہے۔ ہماری سیستم نے 48 میں سے 21st شرکت کی سیستموں کو رسمی ارزیابی میں رکھا۔', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma UMDSub sistema, kuri dalyvavo 2-ojoje SemEval-2018 užduotyje. Mes sukūrėme sistemą, kuri numato emodžius, pateiktus žaliaviniame tekste anglų tweete. The system is a Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network based on subword embeddings for the representation of tweets.  Šis modelis gerina simbolių ar žodžių metodus maždaug 2 %. Mūsų sistema įtraukė 21 iš 48 dalyvaujančių sistemų į oficialų vertinimą.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul UMDSub care a participat la Activitatea 2 a SemEval-2018. Am dezvoltat un sistem care prezice un emoji dat fiind textul brut dintr-un tweet în limba engleză. Sistemul este o Rețea Neurală Convoluțională Multi-canal bazată pe încorporarea subcuvintelor pentru reprezentarea tweeturilor. Acest model îmbunătățește metodele bazate pe caractere sau cuvinte cu aproximativ 2%. Sistemul nostru a plasat 21 din 48 de sisteme participante în evaluarea oficială.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống UMDSS đã tham gia Nhiệm vụ 2 của Semkhai-thẩm 8. Chúng tôi phát triển một hệ thống dự đoán một biểu tượng mặc dù chữ thô trên Twitter. Hệ thống này là một mạng thần kinh đa kênh liên kết kết, dựa trên sự nhúng vào các chữ phụ cho việc mô tả các tweet. Mô hình này cải thiện cách thức dựa trên chữ hay cách thức dựa vào khoảng 2 Name Hệ thống của chúng ta đã đặt động-2-48-bộ phận tham gia đánh giá chính thức.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 Vazifaning 2 Ishga murojaat qiladigan UMDSub tizimini anglatadi. Biz bir tizimni yaratdik, ingliz tilidagi qizil matnni o'rganishni tasavvur qiladi. Name Name Bizning tizimmiz 48'dan 21 ta'minlovchi tizimlarni rasm qiymatga qo'yishdi.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, участвала в задача 2 на СемЕвал-2018. Разработихме система, която прогнозира емоджи предвид суровия текст в английски туит. Системата е многоканална конвелуционна неврална мрежа, базирана на вграждания под думи за представяне на туитове. Този модел подобрява методите на знаци или думи с около 2%. Нашата система постави 21 от 48 участващи системи в официалната оценка.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem UMDSub koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 2 od semiEvala-2018. Razvili smo sistem koji predviđa emoji koji je dao sirov tekst u engleskom tweetu. Sistem je višekanalna konvolucionalna neuronska mreža temeljena na podriječju ugrađenja za predstavljanje tweets. Ovaj model se poboljšava na znakovima ili metodama temeljenih na riječima oko 2%. Naš sustav je postavio 21 od 48 sustava sudjelovanja u službenoj procjeni.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver UMDSub systemet, der deltog i opgave 2 af SemEval-2018. Vi udviklede et system, der forudsiger en emoji givet den rå tekst i en engelsk tweet. Systemet er et Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network baseret på underordsindlejringer til repræsentation af tweets. Denne model forbedrer tegn- eller ordbaserede metoder med ca. 2%. Vores system placerede 21 ud af 48 deltagende systemer i den officielle evaluering.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het UMDSub systeem dat deelnam aan Taak 2 van SemEval-2018. We ontwikkelden een systeem dat een emoji voorspelt gezien de ruwe tekst in een Engelse tweet. Het systeem is een multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network gebaseerd op subwoord embeddings voor de weergave van tweets. Dit model verbetert met ongeveer 2%. Ons systeem plaatste 21ste van 48 deelnemende systemen in de officiële evaluatie.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt das UMDSub-System, das an Task 2 von SemEval-2018 teilgenommen hat. Wir haben ein System entwickelt, das ein Emoji vorhersagt, wenn man den Rohtext eines englischen Tweets sieht. Das System ist ein Multi-Channel Convolutional Neural Network basierend auf Subword Einbettungen zur Darstellung von Tweets. Dieses Modell verbessert Zeichen- oder Wortbasierte Methoden um etwa 2%. Unser System hat 21ste von 48 teilnehmenden Systemen in die offizielle Evaluierung einbezogen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem UMDSub yang berpartisipasi dalam Tugas 2 SemEval-2018. Kami mengembangkan sistem yang memprediksi emoji yang diberikan teks mentah dalam tweet Inggris. Sistem ini adalah jaringan Neural Konvelusional Multi-kanal berdasarkan embedding subword untuk representation tweet. Model ini memperbaiki metode berdasarkan karakter atau kata dengan sekitar 2%. Sistem kami menempatkan 21 dari 48 sistem berpartisipasi dalam evaluasi resmi.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18 퀘스트 2에 참여하는 UMDSub 시스템을 묘사한다.우리는 영문 추문의 원시 텍스트에 따라 이모티콘을 예측하는 시스템을 개발했다.이 시스템은 추문을 나타내는 다중 채널 볼륨 신경 네트워크를 기반으로 한다.이 모델은 문자나 단어를 기반으로 하는 방법보다 약 2퍼센트 높아졌다.우리 시스템은 48개 참여 시스템 중 21위에 랭크되어 있다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa UMDSub ambao ulishiriki katika kazi 2 ya SemEval-2018. Tumeunda mfumo unaotabiri emoji aliyepewa ujumbe mzuri katika twiti ya Kiingereza. Mfumo huo ni Mtandao wa Kifaransa wa Kifaransa unaoandika kwa kutumia ujumbe wa maneno ya chini kwa ajili ya uwakilishi wa twiti. Mfano huu unaboresha kwa tabia au mbinu za maneno kwa takribani asilimia 2. Mfumo wetu uliweka mfumo wa 21 wa 48 kushiriki katika utafiti rasmi.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم UMDSub را توصیف می\u200cکند که در وظیفه ۲ از نیم Eval-2018 شرکت می\u200cکند. ما یک سیستم را توسعه کردیم که یک ایموجی را پیش بینی می\u200cکند که متن خالی را در یک تویت انگلیسی داده است. سیستم یک شبکه عصبی چندین کانال است که بر اساس استفاده\u200cهای زیر کلمه برای نمایش توئیت است. این مدل بر روی شخصیت یا روش\u200cهای بنیاد کلمه به حدود ۲ درصد بهتر می\u200cشود. سیستم ما 21 از 48 سیستم شرکت در ارزیابی رسمی قرار داد.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzyň UMDSub sistemini SemEval-2018-nji gören 2-nji zada goşulan syýasaty tassyýar. Biz iňlisçe tweet bilen hat metini berilen emoji täze bir sistemini öwrüldik. Bu sistem tweets döwletlerini temizlemek üçin bir köp kanally hasaplanç a ýrasy. Bu nusga 2%-de karakter ýa-da sözler tabanly yöntemlerde gelinýär. Biziň sistemamyz resmi deňlemede 48-nji ýüzüniň 21-nji sistemasyny goýdy.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die UMDSub stelsel wat in Taak 2 van SemEval-2018 gedeel het. Ons het 'n stelsel ontwikkel wat 'n emoji voorskou wat die raai teks in 'n Engels tweet gegee het. Die stelsel is 'n Multikanaal Konvolusionele Neural Netwerk gebaseer op subwoord inbêring vir die voorstelling van tweets. Hierdie model verbeter op karakter of woord gebaseerde metodes deur omtrent 2%. Ons stelsel het 21ste van 48 gedeeltelike stelsels in die offisiele evaluering geplaas.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin UMDSub që mori pjesë në detyrën 2 të SemEval-2018. Ne zhvilluam një sistem që parashikon një emoji të dhënë tekstin e papërpunuar në një tweet anglez. Sistemi është një Rrjet Neural Konveolutiv Multikanal bazuar në përfshirjet e nënfjalëve për përfaqësimin e tweeteve. Ky model përmirësohet me rreth 2% në metodat e bazuara në karakter apo fjalë. Sistemi ynë vendosi sistemin e 21-të nga 48 pjesëmarrës në vlerësimin zyrtar.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSemEval-2018 ስራ 2 ተካፈለ UMDSub ሲስተም ይናገራል፡፡ የኢሜጂ ጽሑፉን በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊት የተሰጠውን የጥሩ ጽሑፍ የሚናገረውን ስርዓት አቀረብን፡፡ የድምፅ ውይይት የTwitter አካባቢ ጥያቄዎችን በመሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የብዙ-channel የኔural መረብ ነው፡፡ ይህ ሞዴል በጽሑፍ ወይም ቃላት በሚያህል 2 በመቶ የሚያሳርፍ ነው፡፡ የ48 ተካባሪዎችን ሀያማዊ ስርዓት ውስጥ አካባቢ መሆኑን አስገኘን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է այն համակարգը, որը մասնակցել է ՍեմԵվալ-2018-ի 2-րդ գործին: Մենք զարգացրեցինք մի համակարգ, որը կանխագուշակում է անգլերենի թվիթերում տրված էմոջին: The system is a Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network based on subword embeddings for the representation of tweets.  Այս մոդելը բարելավվում է բնավորության կամ բառի հիմնված մեթոդների վրա մոտ 2 տոկոսով: Մեր համակարգը պաշտոնական գնահատման մեջ տեղադրեց 48-ից 21-ին:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮-এর কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করা UMDSub সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করেছে। আমরা একটি সিস্টেম তৈরি করেছি যা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা হয়েছে একটি ইমোজি ইংরেজি টুইটে ভূল টেক্সট দিয়েছে। টুইটের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য সাবওয়ার্ড বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে এই সিস্টেম একটি মাল্টিক চ্যানেল কনভোলেশন নেউর এই মডেলটি অক্ষর অথবা শব্দ ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতিতে প্রায় ২%। আমাদের সিস্টেম ৪৮ এর ২১তম অংশগ্রহণের ব্যবস্থা আনুষ্ঠানিক মূল্যায়নে রেখেছে।', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu el sistema UMDSub que va participar a la tasca 2 de SemEval-2018. Vam desenvolupar un sistema que prediu un emoji donat el text brut en un tweet anglès. The system is a Multi-channel Convolutional Neural Network based on subword embeddings for the representation of tweets.  Aquest model millora els mètodes basats en caràcters o paraules un 2%. El nostre sistema va posar el 21 de 48 sistemes participants a l'evaluació oficial.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém UMDSub, který se podílel na úkolu 2 SemEval-2018. Vyvinuli jsme systém, který předpovídá emoji vzhledem k syrovému textu v anglickém tweetu. Systém je vícekanálová konveluční neuronová síť založená na vložení podslov pro reprezentaci tweetů. Tento model zlepšuje metody založené na znacích nebo slovech asi o 2%. Náš systém zařadil do oficiálního hodnocení 21tý z 48 zúčastněných systémů.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse UMDSub süsteemi, mis osales SemEval-2018 ülesandes 2. Töötasime välja süsteemi, mis ennustab emojid, arvestades toorteksti inglise säutsu. Süsteem on mitmekanaliline konvolutsiooniline neurovõrk, mis põhineb alamsõna manustamisel säutsude esitamiseks. See mudel parandab märgi- või sõnapõhiseid meetodeid umbes 2%. Meie süsteem asetas ametlikule hindamisele 48 osalevast süsteemist 21. osa.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval-2018:n tehtävään 2 osallistunut UMDSub-järjestelmä. Kehitimme järjestelmän, joka ennustaa hymiön englanninkielisen twiitin raakatekstin perusteella. Järjestelmä on monikanavainen konvolutionaalinen hermoverkko, joka perustuu alasanaupotuksiin tweettien esittämiseen. Tämä malli parantaa merkki- tai sanapohjaisia menetelmiä noin 2%. Järjestelmämme sijoitti viralliseen arviointiin 21. järjestelmän 48 osallistujasta.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem UMDSub koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 2 od semiEvala-2018. Razvili smo sistem koji predviđa emoji koji je dao sirov tekst u engleskom tweetu. Sistem je višekanalna konvolucionalna neuronska mreža bazirana na podriječjim integracijama za predstavljanje tweeta. Ovaj model se poboljšava na karakteru ili metodi temeljenih na riječima oko 2%. Naš sistem je postavio 21 od 48 sustava sudjelovanja u službenoj procjeni.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, 2. Gözəl-2018-in İkinci Gözəl-ə katılan UMDSub sistemini təsbiq edir. Biz İngilizə tweet içində çətin mətnə verilən emoji təmin edən bir sistemi yaratdıq. Sistem twet göstəricisi üçün süb sözlərə dayanan çox kanallı Convolutional Neural Network idi. Bu model karakter ya da söz tabanlı metodlarını 2%-dən artırar. Sistemimiz 48 sistemlərin 21-ini resmi değerlendirməyə qoydu.', 'ha': 'Wannan takardan na describe the UMDSub system that took part in Tafiyar 2 of SemEl-2018. Mun ƙãga wani matsayi wanda ya yi wani hiso da aka bai wa matsayin raw cikin wani littafi na Ingiriya. @ action: button @ info: whatsthis Our system placed 21st of 48 participating systems in the official evaluation.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem UMDSub, ki je sodeloval v nalogi 2 SemEval-2018. Razvili smo sistem, ki napoveduje emoji glede na surovo besedilo v angleškem tweetu. Sistem je večkanalno konvolucijsko živčno omrežje, ki temelji na vdelavah podbesed za predstavitev tweetov. Ta model izboljšuje metode na podlagi znakov ali besed za približno 2%. Naš sistem je v uradno oceno uvrstil 21. od 48 sodelujočih sistemov.', 'jv': 'Ngerungan iki oleh nggarang sistem MDDUb sing wis nguasakno ning task 2 ning semi-2008. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing urênêmên kanggo ngerti Emaji rambarang kelas nang tuwit Inggris. Sistem dadi Multi-channel modelo iki dadi supaya karcis tualah karo perangkat saben nang sampeyan 2%. Sistem awak dhéwé wis nambah tanggal UTF-8 sing sampek ning pancen offisisi sing katêpakan.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval-2018 དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟ་བུའི་UMDSub་གི་མ་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཨིན་ཇིའི་དྲ་ཐོ་གི་ནང་དུ་emoji་ཡིག་ཆའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱས་ཡོད། མ་ལག་ནི་འདིའི་རྒྱུ་ལམ་སྣ་མང་ཆེ་མཐུད་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རང་དབང་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་ཡིག་འབྲུ་དང་ཐ་སྙད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕྱོགས་གཉིས་པ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་རྩིས་གཞུང་འབྲེལ་དཔྱད་པར་དབུགས་ཀྱི་འགྲོ་རིམ་༢༨་ཡིན་པ', 'he': "העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכת UMDSub שהשתתפה במשימה 2 של SemEval-2018. פיתחנו מערכת שמחזיקה אמוג'י שנתנה את הטקסט האדום בטוויט אנגלי. המערכת היא רשת נוירולית רבה ערוצים שמבוססת על תוספות מתחת מילים לייצג טוויטים. This model improves on character or word based methods by about 2%.  Our system placed 21st of 48 participating systems in the official evaluation."}
{'en': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Emojis : Too many Choices?', 'ar': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: الرموز التعبيرية: خيارات كثيرة جدًا؟', 'fr': 'Umduluth-CS8761 à SemEval-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Emojis\xa0: trop de choix\xa0?', 'pt': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 em SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Emojis: Muitas opções?', 'es': 'Umduluth-CS8761 en SemEval-2018 Tarea 2: Emojis: ¿Demasiadas opciones?', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のUMDuluth - CS 8761タスク2 ：絵文字：選択肢が多すぎますか？', 'zh': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 务2:表情符号择多?', 'hi': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर: Emojis: बहुत सारे विकल्प?', 'ru': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Эмодзи: Слишком много вариантов?', 'ga': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Emojis: An Iomarca Roghanna?', 'ka': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis: Too many choices?', 'hu': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Emojis: Túl sok választás?', 'el': 'Καθήκον 2: Πάρα πολλές επιλογές;', 'it': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji: Troppe scelte?', 'kk': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында 2- тапсырма: Эмози: Таңдау қанша?', 'ms': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Emojis: Terlalu banyak pilihan?', 'mt': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 2: Emojis: Għażliet wisq?', 'mn': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis: Too many choices?', 'mk': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Емоџис: Премногу избори?', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: എമോജിസ്: വളരെ തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കങ്ങള്\u200d?', 'lt': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-2018 2 užduotis: Emojis: Per daug pasirinkimų?', 'no': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2: Emojiar: For mange val?', 'pl': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Emojis: Zbyt wiele wyborów?', 'ro': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Emoji: Prea multe alegeri?', 'sv': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Emojis: För många val?', 'sr': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Emoji: Previše izbora?', 'si': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at Half-2018 Job 2: Emosis: Too lot choices?', 'so': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Shaqada 2: Emojis: Too badan doorasho?', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 2: Emojis: அதிகமான தேர்வுகள்?', 'ur': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis: Too many choices?', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 vazifa 2: Emojis: Koʻproq tanlanganni?', 'vi': 'UMDulles-CS871 tại Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task 2: Emojis: Quá nhiều Lựa chọn?', 'da': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Emojis: For mange valg?', 'hr': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Emoji: Previše izbora?', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Емоциите: Твърде много избори?', 'de': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Emojis: Zu viele Wahlmöglichkeiten?', 'ko': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-18 작업2: 이모티콘: 너무 많이 선택했어?', 'nl': "UMDuluth-CS8761 bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Emoji's: Te veel keuzes?", 'sw': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 2: Emojis: Uchaguzi nyingi sana?', 'tr': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis: Too many options?', 'id': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis: Too many Choices?', 'fa': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 در ماموریت ۲: Emojis: انتخاب زیادی؟', 'am': 'የሳምEval-2018 ስራ 2: ኢሜጂ: ምርጫዎች ብዙ ናቸው?', 'af': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 by SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Emojies: Te veel keuses?', 'az': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis: Too many options?', 'bs': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Emoji: Previše izbora?', 'sq': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis: Shumë zgjedhje?', 'hy': 'ՕմԴուլյութ-ՍՍ87-61-ը ՍեմԷվալ-2018-ի 2. հանձնարարությունը. Էմոյզիս. չափազանց շատ տարբերակներ:', 'ca': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis: massa opcions?', 'fi': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Emojit: Liian monta vaihtoehtoa?', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: ইমোজিস: অনেক পছন্দ?', 'cs': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Emojis: Příliš mnoho možností?', 'et': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 2: Emojid: liiga palju valikuid?', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 ב SemEval-2018 משימה 2: Emojis: יותר מדי בחירות?', 'sk': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: Emojis: Preveč izbir?', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'bo': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis: Too many Choices?'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present our system for assigning an emoji to a tweet based on the text. Each tweet was originally posted with an emoji which the task providers removed. Our task was to decide out of 20 emojis, which originally came with the tweet. Two datasets were provided-one in English and the other in Spanish. We treated the task as a standard classification task with the emojis as our classes and the tweets as our documents. Our best performing system used a Bag of Words model with a Linear Support Vector Machine as its’ classifier. We achieved a macro F1 score of 32.73 % for the English data and 17.98 % for the Spanish data.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نظامنا لتخصيص رمز تعبيري لتغريدة بناءً على النص. تم نشر كل تغريدة في الأصل مع رمز تعبيري أزاله موفرو المهام. كانت مهمتنا أن نقرر من بين 20 رمزًا تعبيريًا ، والتي جاءت في الأصل مع التغريدة. تم توفير مجموعتي بيانات - واحدة باللغة الإنجليزية والأخرى باللغة الإسبانية. تعاملنا مع المهمة كمهمة تصنيف معيارية مع الرموز التعبيرية باعتبارها فصولًا لدينا والتغريدات باعتبارها مستنداتنا. استخدم نظامنا الأفضل أداءً نموذج Bag of Words مع آلة متجه الدعم الخطي كـ "مصنف". لقد حققنا درجة ماكرو F1 بلغت 32.73٪ للبيانات الإنجليزية و 17.98٪ للبيانات الإسبانية.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos nuestro sistema para asignar un emoji a un tweet en función del texto. Cada tweet se publicó originalmente con un emoji que los proveedores de tareas eliminaron. Nuestra tarea era decidir entre 20 emojis, que originalmente venían con el tuit. Se proporcionaron dos conjuntos de datos, uno en inglés y otro en español. Tratamos la tarea como una tarea de clasificación estándar, con los emojis como nuestras clases y los tuits como documentos. Nuestro sistema de mejor rendimiento utilizó un modelo Bag of Words con una máquina de vectores de soporte lineal como clasificador. Logramos una puntuación macro F1 del 32,73% para los datos ingleses y del 17,98% para los datos españoles.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons notre système d'attribution d'un emoji à un tweet en fonction du texte. Chaque tweet était initialement publié avec un emoji que les fournisseurs de tâches ont supprimé. Notre tâche était de choisir parmi 20 emojis, qui étaient initialement fournis avec le tweet. Deux ensembles de données ont été fournis, l'un en anglais et l'autre en espagnol. Nous avons traité la tâche comme une tâche de classification standard avec les emojis comme nos classes et les tweets comme nos documents. Notre système le plus performant utilisait un modèle de sac de mots avec une machine vectorielle à support linéaire comme classificateur. Nous avons obtenu un score macro F1 de 32,73\xa0% pour les données anglaises et de 17,98\xa0% pour les données espagnoles.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos nosso sistema para atribuir um emoji a um tweet com base no texto. Cada tweet foi originalmente postado com um emoji que os provedores de tarefas removeram. Nossa tarefa era decidir entre 20 emojis, que originalmente vinham com o tweet. Dois conjuntos de dados foram fornecidos - um em inglês e outro em espanhol. Tratamos a tarefa como uma tarefa de classificação padrão com os emojis como nossas classes e os tweets como nossos documentos. Nosso sistema de melhor desempenho utilizou um modelo Bag of Words com uma Máquina de Vetor de Suporte Linear como seu classificador. Alcançamos uma pontuação macro F1 de 32,73% para os dados em inglês e 17,98% para os dados em espanhol.', 'ja': '本稿では、テキストに基づいてツイートに絵文字を割り当てるシステムを提示する。各ツイートは元々、タスクプロバイダーが削除した絵文字で投稿されていました。私たちの課題は20個の絵文字の中から決めることでしたもともとツイートに付いていたものです2つのデータセットが提供されました。1つは英語、もう1つはスペイン語です。絵文字をクラスとして、ツイートをドキュメントとして、このタスクを標準的な分類タスクとして扱いました。当社の最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するシステムは、リニアサポートベクターマシンを分類器として備えた言葉の袋モデルを使用しました。英語データでは32.73 ％、スペイン語データでは17.98 ％のマクロF 1スコアを達成しました。', 'hi': "इस पेपर में, हम पाठ के आधार पर एक ट्वीट के लिए एक इमोजी असाइन करने के लिए अपना सिस्टम प्रस्तुत करते हैं। प्रत्येक ट्वीट को मूल रूप से एक इमोजी के साथ पोस्ट किया गया था जिसे कार्य प्रदाताओं ने हटा दिया था। हमारा काम 20 इमोजी में से निर्णय लेना था, जो मूल रूप से ट्वीट के साथ आया था। दो डेटासेट प्रदान किए गए थे - एक अंग्रेजी में और दूसरा स्पेनिश में। हमने कार्य को हमारे वर्गों के रूप में इमोजी के साथ एक मानक वर्गीकरण कार्य के रूप में माना और हमारे दस्तावेजों के रूप में ट्वीट्स। हमारे सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्रणाली अपने 'क्लासिफायर के रूप में एक रैखिक समर्थन वेक्टर मशीन के साथ शब्दों के एक बैग मॉडल का इस्तेमाल किया. हमने अंग्रेजी डेटा के लिए 32.73% और स्पेनिश डेटा के लिए 17.98% का मैक्रो F1 स्कोर हासिल किया।", 'zh': '于本文中,言文本为推文分表情符号之统。 推文初发一表情符号,务提供者删表情符号。 吾曹决20表情符号,表情符号始随推文出。 二数集 - 一英文,一西班牙文。 我以职为率,表情符号为我类,推文为我文档。 吾性能最佳者线性带向量机者单词囊为器。 臣等英语数,于 F1 之宏观分为 32.73%,于西班牙语数各得 17.98% 之分。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем нашу систему присвоения эмодзи твиту на основе текста. Каждый твит был изначально размещен с эмодзи, которые провайдеры удалили. Наша задача состояла в том, чтобы выбрать из 20 эмодзи, которые изначально пришли с твитом. Были представлены два набора данных - один на английском языке, а другой на испанском языке. Мы рассматривали задачу как стандартную классификационную задачу с эмодзи в качестве наших классов и твитами в качестве наших документов. Наша лучшая система использовала модель Bag of Words с векторной машиной линейной поддержки в качестве классификатора. Мы достигли макрорезультата F1 32,73% для английских данных и 17,98% для испанских данных.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid ár gcóras i láthair chun emoji a shannadh do thweet bunaithe ar an téacs. Postáladh gach tweet ar dtús le emoji a bhain na soláthraithe tasc. Ba é an tasc a bhí againn ná cinneadh a dhéanamh as 20 emojis, a tháinig leis an tweet ar dtús. Cuireadh dhá thacar sonraí ar fáil - ceann i mBéarla agus an ceann eile i Spáinnis. Dhéileálamar leis an tasc mar thasc caighdeánach rangaithe leis na emojis mar ár ranganna agus na tweets mar ár ndoiciméid. Bhain ár gcóras feidhmíochta is fearr úsáid as samhail Mála Focal le Meaisín Veicteoir Tacaíochta Líneach mar aicmitheoir. Bhaineamar amach macra-scór F1 de 32.73% do na sonraí Sasanacha agus 17.98% do shonraí na Spáinne.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε το σύστημά μας για την ανάθεση ενός σε ένα tweet βασισμένο στο κείμενο. Κάθε tweet δημοσιεύτηκε αρχικά με ένα emoji το οποίο οι πάροχοι εργασιών αφαίρεσαν. Το καθήκον μας ήταν να αποφασίσουμε από τα είκοσι τα οποία αρχικά ήρθαν με το tweet. Παρουσιάστηκαν δύο σύνολα δεδομένων, το ένα στα αγγλικά και το άλλο στα ισπανικά. Αντιμετωπίσαμε την εργασία ως μια τυπική εργασία ταξινόμησης με τα emojis ως μαθήματα μας και τα tweets ως έγγραφα μας. Το σύστημα καλύτερης απόδοσης χρησιμοποίησε ένα μοντέλο τσάντας λέξεων με μια γραμμική διανυσματική μηχανή υποστήριξης ως ταξινομητή του. Επιτύχαμε μακροβαθμολογία F1 32,73% για τα αγγλικά δεδομένα και 17,98% για τα ισπανικά δεδομένα.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a rendszerünket, amelynek segítségével emojit rendelhetünk egy tweethez a szöveg alapján. Minden tweetet eredetileg egy emojival tettek közzé, amelyet a feladatszolgáltatók eltávolítottak. A feladatunk az volt, hogy eldöntsük a 20 emojit, ami eredetileg a tweettel jött. Két adatkészletet biztosítottak - az egyik angol, a másik spanyol nyelven. A feladatot szabványos osztályozási feladatként kezeltük, az emojik osztályainkként, a tweetek pedig dokumentumainkként. A legjobb teljesítményű rendszerünk egy Bag of Words modellt használt, amelynek osztályozója lineáris támogatású vektorgép. Az angol adatok esetében 32,73%-os F1 makro pontszámot értünk el, a spanyol adatok esetében pedig 17,98%-os.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემა ტექსტის ბაზედ ემოჯიას გადავიტანოთ. ყოველ tweet იყო პირველად ემოჯიზით, რომელიც მომხმარებელი მომხმარებელი წაშლა. ჩვენი სამუშაო იყო 20 ემიეზიდან გადაწყვეტა, რომელიც საწყისო გადასვლა. ორი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია იყო - ერთი ინგლისურად და ერთი შაონისურად. ჩვენ დავაკეთებდით, როგორც სტანდარტური კლასიფიკაციის დავაკეთებდით, როგორც ჩვენი კლასი და tweets, როგორც ჩვენი დოკუმენტები. ჩვენი საუკეთესო გამოყენებელი სისტემა გამოყენება სიტყვების მოდელს, რომელიც ლინიური მხარდაჭერის გვექტორის მაქსინი როგორც მისი კლასიფიკაცია. ჩვენ მივიღეთ მაკრო F1 წერტილი 32,73% ინგლისური მონაცემებისთვის და 17,98% ინგლისური მონაცემებისთვის.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, мәтініне негізделген эмоджияны таңдау үшін жүйеңізді таңдаймыз. Әрбір tweet бастапқы тапсырма провиторларының өшірілген эмоджімен жіберілді. Біздің тапсырмамыз 20 эмужасын шешіміз болды. Бұл бастапқы tweet-мен келді. Екі деректер жиыны келтірілді - бірі ағылшын тілінде және бірінші испан тілінде. Біз тапсырманы көзіміздің классы және tweets деген құжаттар ретінде стандартты классификациялау тапсырмасы ретінде қаладық. Біздің ең жақсы орындау жүйесіміз сызық қолдау вектор машинасының классификациясы ретінде сөздер үлгісін қолданды. Біз ағылшын деректеріне 32,73% Макро F1 деңгейін және 17,98% Испан деректеріне жеткіздік.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo il nostro sistema per assegnare un emoji a un tweet basato sul testo. Ogni tweet è stato originariamente pubblicato con un'emoji che i provider di attività hanno rimosso. Il nostro compito era quello di decidere tra 20 emoji, che originariamente venivano con il tweet. Sono stati forniti due set di dati, uno in inglese e l'altro in spagnolo. Abbiamo trattato il compito come un compito di classificazione standard con le emoji come le nostre classi e i tweet come i nostri documenti. Il nostro sistema più performante ha utilizzato un modello Bag of Words con una macchina vettoriale di supporto lineare come suo classificatore. Abbiamo ottenuto un punteggio macro F1 del 32,73% per i dati inglesi e del 17,98% per i dati spagnoli.", 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan sistem kami untuk mengarahkan emoji kepada tweet berdasarkan teks. Setiap tweet dahulu diposting dengan emoji yang mana penyedia tugas dibuang. Tugas kami adalah untuk memutuskan daripada 20 emoji, yang asalnya datang dengan tweet. Two datasets were provided - one in English and the other in Spanish.  Kami memperlakukan tugas ini sebagai tugas klasifikasi piawai dengan emoji sebagai kelas kami dan tweet sebagai dokumen kami. Sistem prestasi terbaik kami menggunakan model Beg of Words dengan Mesin Vektor Sokongan Linear sebagai pengklasifikasinya. Kami mencapai skor F1 makro 32.73% untuk data Inggeris dan 17.98% untuk data Spanyol.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഇമോജിയെ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d കാണിച്ച Each tweet was originally posted with an emoji which the task providers removed.  ഞങ്ങളുടെ ജോലി 20 ഇമോജിക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും തീരുമാനിക്കാനായിരുന്നു. അത് ആദ്യമായി ടൂട്ടിയില്\u200d വന്നു. രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകിയിരുന്നു - ഒന്ന് ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും മറ്റേത് സ്പാനിഷിലും. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയെ സാധാരണ വ്യവസ്ഥയാക്കിയിരുന്നു. ഇമോജിസിനെ ഞങ്ങളുടെ ക്ലാസുകളായി ഞങ്ങളുടെ ടൂട്ടുകളും നമ്മുടെ രേ നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം ലൈനിയര്\u200d പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d യന്ത്രം അതിന്റെ ക്ലാസിഫിക ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡേറ്റായും 17.98% സ്പാനിഷ് ഡേറ്റായും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മാക്രോ F1 സ്കോര്\u200d നേടിയിരുന്നു.', 'mk': "Во овој весник го претставуваме нашиот систем за додавање емоџи на твит базиран на текстот. Секој твит првично беше објавен со емоџи кои ги отстраниле обезбедувачите на задачи. Нашата задача беше да одлучиме од 20 емоџии, кои првично дојдоа со твитот. Two datasets were provided - one in English and the other in Spanish.  Ја третиравме задачата како стандардна класификација со емоџиите како наши класи и твитови како наши документи. Our best performing system used a Bag of Words model with a Linear Support Vector Machine as its' classifier.  Ние постигнавме макро-Ф1 оценка од 32,73 отсто за англиските податоци и 17,98 отсто за шпанските податоци.", 'lt': "Šiame dokumente pristatysime savo sistemą, pagal kurią emoji priskiriama prie tekstu pagrįsto tweeto. Kiekvienas tweetas iš pradžių buvo paskelbtas su emoji, kurią užduočių teikėjai pašalino. Mūsų užduotis buvo nuspręsti iš 20 emodžių, kurie iš pradžių buvo su tweetu. Buvo pateikti du duomenų rinkiniai - vienas anglų kalba ir kitas ispanų kalba. Mes šią užduotį vertinome kaip standartinę klasifikavimo užduotį su emodžijais kaip mūsų klases ir tweetus kaip mūsų dokumentus. Our best performing system used a Bag of Words model with a Linear Support Vector Machine as its' classifier.  We achieved a macro F1 score of 32.73% for the English data and 17.98% for the Spanish data.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэхүү системийг текст дээр суурилсан эможийг тайлбарлахын тулд тайлбарлаж байна. Твитт бүр эхлээд ажлын хандивлагчид хадгалагдсан эможид тавигдсан. Бидний даалгавар нь 20 emojis-ээс шийдвэрлэх байсан юм. Энэ нь эхлээд tweet-тай гарч ирсэн юм. Хоёр өгөгдлийн сангууд - нэг Англи хэлний, нөгөө нь Испан хэлний. Бид үүнийг эмужийн хичээл, tweets-г бичил баримтууд болгон стандарт хуваалцах үйл ажиллагаа гэж үзсэн. Бидний хамгийн шилдэг үйл ажиллагааны систем Linear Support вектор машины хувьд хэлбэртэй үг загварыг ашигласан. Бид Англи хэлний өгөгдлийн хувьд 32.73% Макро F1 хувьд, Испанийн өгөгдлийн хувьд 17.98%.', 'no': 'I denne papiret viser vi systemet vårt for å tilordna ein emoji til ein tweet basert på teksten. Kvar tweet vart opprinneleg sendt med ein emoji som oppgåveljarane fjerna. Oppgåva vårt var å bestemme ut av 20 emojis, som opphavleg kom med tweet. To datasett vart oppgjeven – ein på engelsk og den andre på spansk. Vi behalda oppgåva som standardklassifikasjon med emojis som våre klasser og tweetene som våre dokument. Det beste utføringssystemet vår brukte ein Bag of Words Modell med ein Linear Support Vector Machine som sin klassifiserer. Vi har oppnådd eit makro F1- poeng med 32,73% for engelske data og 17,98% for spanske data.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw is-sistema tagħna għall-assenjazzjoni ta’ emoji għal tweet ibbażat fuq it-test. Kull tweet oriġinarjament kien ippubblikat b’emoji li l-fornituri tal-kompiti neħħew. Il-kompitu tagħna kien li niddeċiedu minn 20 emoji, li oriġinarjament waslu mat-tweet. Two datasets were provided - one in English and the other in Spanish.  Intrattajna l-kompitu bħala kompitu standard ta’ klassifikazzjoni mal-emoji bħala l-klassijiet tagħna u t-tweets bħala d-dokumenti tagħna. Is-sistema tagħna bl-a ħjar prestazzjoni użat mudell ta’ Bag of Words b’Magna tal-Vetturi ta’ Appoġġ Lineari bħala l-klassifikatur tagħha. Kisbu punteġġ makro F1 ta’ 32.73% għad-dejta Ingliża u 17.98% għad-dejta Spanjola.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš sistem za dodavanje emoji na tweet na temelju teksta. Svaki tweet je prvo postavljen emoji koji su pružatelji zadataka uklonili. Naš zadatak je bio da odlučimo od 20 emojis, koji je prvo došao sa tweetom. Dva podataka je pružena - jedna na engleskom i druga na španjolskom. Tretirali smo zadatak kao standardnu klasifikaciju sa emojima kao naše klase i tweets kao naši dokumenti. Naš najbolji izvršni sistem je koristio vreću reèi model sa linijskim vektorskim mašinom za njegovu klasifikaciju. Postigli smo makro F1 rezultat od 32,73% za engleske podatke i 17,98% za španjolske podatke.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය පාළුවට අධිරූපයෙන් තියෙන්නේ එමෝජික් එකක් ට්විට් එකක්. හැම ට්විට් එක්ක මුලින්ම එමෝජි එක්ක පිළිබඳ කරලා තියෙනවා මේ වැඩක් ප්\u200dරදානකරුවන් අතිර අපේ වැඩේ තමයි එමෝජිස් 20 වලින් තීරණය කරන්න, මුලින්ම ට්විට් එක්ක ආවේ. දත්ත සැට් දෙකක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් අනිත් ස්පැනිස් වලින්. අපි මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරමාණික විශේෂණ වැඩක් විදිහට අපේ විශේෂ වලින් අපේ විශේෂ වලින් ට්විට් වලින් ප්\u200dරම අපේ හොඳම වැඩ කරන්න පද්ධතිය පාවිච්චි කරනවා වචන පද්ධතියක් ලිනියර් සහය වෙක්ටර් මැෂින් එක්ක ඒකේ විශේෂ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි දත්ත සඳහා මැක්රෝ F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 32.73% තියෙනවා, ස්පැනිස් දත්ත සඳහා 17.98% තියෙනවා.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa nidaamka a an emoji u dirno twiti ku saleysan qoraalka. Tweet kasta waxaa asalka loo soo bandhigay emoji, kaas oo shaqaalaha ka soo qaaday. Shaqadeenu waxay ahayd in aan go'aan ka gaaro 20 emojis, taasoo ugu horeysa ku timid Twitter. Laba databases waxaa la bixiyay - mid af Ingiriis, kan kalena Isbanish. Waxaannu shaqada u macaamiloonnay sida shaqada fasalka caadi ah oo kale emojiska oo ah fasalkayaga iyo tweetiyadayada sida dukumentiyadayada. nidaamkayaga ugu wanaagsan ee sameynta ayaa isticmaalay baag of Words, kaas oo leh kaalmada Vector oo Linear. Waxaannu gaadhnay macro F1 koox oo ah 32.73 boqolkiiba oo ku saabsan macro F1 takwirada Ingiriiska iyo 17.98 boqolkiiba takwirada Isbanish.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi vårt system för att tilldela en emoji till en tweet baserat på texten. Varje tweet publicerades ursprungligen med en emoji som uppgiftsleverantörerna tog bort. Vår uppgift var att bestämma av 20 emojis, som ursprungligen kom med tweeten. Två dataset tillhandahölls - en på engelska och den andra på spanska. Vi behandlade uppgiften som en standardklassificeringsuppgift med emojis som våra klasser och tweets som våra dokument. Vårt mest presterande system använde en Bag of Words modell med en Linear Support Vector Machine som klassificerare. Vi uppnådde en makro F1 poäng på 32,73% för engelska data och 17,98% för spanska data.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் உரையை அடிப்படையிலான ஒரு உணர்ச்சியை ஒரு தொடர்புக்கு அனுப்புவதற்கான நம் அமைப்பை கா ஒவ்வொரு செயல் வழங்குபவரும் நீக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு emoji உடன் ஒவ்வொரு தொடர்பு அனுப்பப்பட்டது. Our task was to decide out of 20 emojis, which originally came with the tweet.  இரண்டு தரவு அமைப்புகள் வழங்கப்பட்டது - ஒன்று ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் மற்றொரு ஸ்பானிஷ்Name நாங்கள் இந்த பணியை ஒரு நிலையான வகுப்பு பணியாக செயல்படுத்தினோம் எம்ஜி எங்கள் வகுப்புகள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகள் எங்கள் ஆவ எங்கள் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் அமைப்பு வார்த்தைகள் மாதிரி ஒரு பாக் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது ஒரு வரி ஆதரவு வெக்டார் இயந்திரம் அதன் நாங்கள் ஒரு மேக்ரோ F1 மதிப்பு 32.73% பெற்றோம் ஆங்கிலத்தின் தரவுக்கும் 17.98% ஸ்பானிஷ் தரவுக்கும்.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nasz system przypisywania emoji do tweeta na podstawie tekstu. Każdy tweet został pierwotnie opublikowany z emoji, które usunęli dostawcy zadań. Naszym zadaniem było zdecydowanie się spośród dwudziestu emoji, które pierwotnie pojawiły się wraz z tweetem. Dostarczono dwa zbiory danych: jeden w języku angielskim i drugi w języku hiszpańskim. Traktowaliśmy to zadanie jako standardowe zadanie klasyfikacyjne, z emoji jako naszych klas, a tweety jako nasze dokumenty. Nasz najlepiej wydajny system wykorzystał model Bag of Words z liniową maszyną wektorową jako klasyfikator. Osiągnęliśmy makro F1 wynik 32,73% dla danych angielskich i 17,98% dla danych hiszpańskich.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم اپنے سیستم کو ایک ٹویٹ کے ذریعہ ایک ایموجی کا مقرر کرنے کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ہر ٹویٹ پہلی بار ایک ایموجی کے ساتھ پوسٹ کی گئی ہے جسے کام پرائیزگاروں نے ہٹا دیا ہے. ہمارا کام 20 emojis سے فیصلہ کرنا تھا جو پہلی بار ٹویٹ کے ساتھ آیا۔ دو ڈاٹ سٹ دیے گئے - ایک انگلیسی میں اور دوسرا اسپانیایی میں۔ ہم نے اس کام کو ہمارے کلاس اور ٹویٹ کو ہمارے دکھانے کے طور پر استاندارڈ کلسفون کا کام بنایا تھا۔ ہماری بہترین عمل سیسٹم نے ایک بات مدل کو لینر مدد ویکتور ماشین کے ساتھ استعمال کیا۔ ہم نے انگلیسی ڈیٹا کے لئے 32.73% کی مکرو F1 سکوٹ پہنچا اور 17.98% اسپانیایی ڈیٹا کے لئے۔', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm sistemul nostru de atribuire a unui emoji unui tweet bazat pe text. Fiecare tweet a fost postat inițial cu un emoji pe care furnizorii de sarcini l-au eliminat. Sarcina noastră a fost să decidem din 20 de emoji-uri, care au venit inițial odată cu tweet. Au fost furnizate două seturi de date - unul în limba engleză și celălalt în limba spaniolă. Am tratat sarcina ca o sarcină standard de clasificare cu emojis-urile ca clasele noastre și tweets-urile ca documentele noastre. Sistemul nostru cel mai performant a folosit un model Bag of Words cu o mașină vectorială de suport liniar ca clasificator. Am obținut un scor F1 macro de 32,73% pentru datele engleze și 17,98% pentru datele spaniole.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz matn asosida emoji bo'lgan Twitterdan foydalanish uchun tizimmizni hozir qilamiz. Har bir Twitter aslida vazifa olib tashlangan emoji bilan qo'yilgan edi. Bizning ishimiz 20 emojis bilan boshlashni boshlash edi. Ikki maʼlumotlar tarkibi - biri ingliz tilida, boshqa Ispanchaga. Biz shunday vazifani o'zimizning sinflarimiz va Twittlarning hujjatlarimiz sifatida o'xshash darajadagi darajalar sifatida bajaramiz. Bizning eng yaxshi bajarish tizimimiz chiziq qoʻllanmalar va vektori uskunasi sifatida ishlatiladi. Biz ingliz tili maʼlumotlari uchun macro F1 qismi 32.73% va Ispancha maʼlumotlar uchun 17.98%.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu hệ thống bố trí một biểu tượng trên Twitter dựa trên bản thảo. Mỗi tweet được đăng với một mẹo trang bị các nhà cung cấp nhiệm vụ loại bỏ. Nhiệm vụ của chúng tôi là quyết định trong 71 biểu tượng ban đầu mang dòng tweet. Có hai bộ dữ liệu được cung cấp... một trong tiếng Anh và một trong tiếng Tây Ban Nha. Chúng tôi coi nhiệm vụ này như một nhiệm vụ phân loại tiêu chuẩn với biểu tượng như hạng học và tweet là tài liệu. Hệ thống ứng cử tốt nhất của chúng tôi sử dụng một mẫu ngôn ngữ với một cỗ máy Vectror tuyến tính làm người phân loại. Chúng tôi đã đạt được một số vi phạm F1 trong 32.73=. for the English data và 17.97. for the Spanish data.', 'da': "I denne artikel præsenterer vi vores system til at tildele en emoji til en tweet baseret på teksten. Hver tweet blev oprindeligt sendt med en emoji, som opgaveudbyderne fjernede. Vores opgave var at beslutte ud af 20 emojis, som oprindeligt kom med tweeten. Der blev stillet to datasæt til rådighed - det ene på engelsk og det andet på spansk. Vi behandlede opgaven som en standardklassifikationsopgave med emojis som vores klasser og tweets som vores dokumenter. Vores bedst ydende system brugte en Bag of Words model med en Linear Support Vector Machine som sin 'klassificering. Vi opnåede en makro F1 score på 32,73% for de engelske data og 17,98% for de spanske data.", 'nl': "In dit artikel presenteren we ons systeem voor het toewijzen van een emoji aan een tweet op basis van de tekst. Elke tweet werd oorspronkelijk gepost met een emoji die de taakproviders verwijderden. Onze taak was om te kiezen uit twintig emoji's, die oorspronkelijk bij de tweet kwamen. Er werden twee datasets verstrekt, een in het Engels en de andere in het Spaans. We behandelden de taak als een standaard classificatietaak met de emoji's als onze lessen en de tweets als onze documenten. Ons best presterende systeem gebruikte een Bag of Words model met een Linear Support Vector Machine als classificator. We behaalden een macro F1 score van 32,73% voor de Engelse gegevens en 17,98% voor de Spaanse gegevens.", 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме нашата система за присвояване на емоджи на туит въз основа на текста. Всеки туит първоначално беше публикуван с емоджи, който доставчиците на задачи премахнаха. Нашата задача беше да решим между 20 емоджи, които първоначално идваха с туита. Бяха предоставени два набора данни - единият на английски и другият на испански. Ние третирахме задачата като стандартна задача за класификация с емотиконите като наши класове и туитовете като наши документи. Нашата най-ефективна система използва модел торба с думи с машина за линейна поддръжка като класификатор. Постигнахме макрооценка от 32,73% за английските данни и 17,98% за испанските данни.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš sustav za dodavanje emoji tweetu na temelju teksta. Svaki tweet je početno postavljen emoji koji su pružatelji zadataka uklonili. Naš zadatak je bio odlučiti od 20 emojis, koji je prvo došao sa tweetom. Dvije podatke su pružene - jedna na engleskom i druga na španjolskom. Poslužili smo zadatak kao standardni zadatak klasifikacije emojima kao časove i tweets kao naši dokumenti. Naš najbolji izvođa čki sustav koristio je vrećicu riječi model s linearnim vektorskim strojem kao njegov klasifikator. Postigli smo makro F1 rezultat od 32,73% za engleske podatke i 17,98% za španjolske podatke.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unser System vor, um einem Tweet basierend auf dem Text ein Emoji zuzuweisen. Jeder Tweet wurde ursprünglich mit einem Emoji gepostet, das die Aufgabenanbieter entfernt haben. Unsere Aufgabe war es, aus zwanzig Emojis zu entscheiden, die ursprünglich mit dem Tweet geliefert wurden. Zwei Datensätze wurden bereitgestellt, einer auf Englisch und der andere auf Spanisch. Wir behandelten die Aufgabe als Standard-Klassifikationsaufgabe mit den Emojis als unsere Klassen und den Tweets als unsere Dokumente. Unser leistungsstärkstes System verwendete ein Bag of Words-Modell mit einer Linear Support Vector Machine als Klassifikator. Wir erreichten einen Makro F1 Score von 32,73% für die englischen Daten und 17,98% für die spanischen Daten.', 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan sistem kami untuk mengarahkan emoji kepada tweet berdasarkan teks. Setiap tweet pada awalnya diposting dengan emoji yang dibersihkan penyedia tugas. Tugas kami adalah untuk memutuskan dari 20 emoji, yang pada awalnya datang dengan tweet. Dua set data diberikan - satu dalam bahasa Inggris dan yang lain dalam bahasa Spanyol. Kami memperlakukan tugas sebagai tugas klasifikasi standar dengan emoji sebagai kelas kami dan tweet sebagai dokumen kami. Our best performing system used a Bag of Words model with a Linear Support Vector Machine as its' classifier.  Kami mencapai skor F1 makro 32,73% untuk data Inggris dan 17,98% untuk data Spanyol.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mfumo wetu wa kutengeneza emoji kwenye twiti inayotumia ujumbe huu. Kila twiti kilichapishwa na hisia ambazo watoa kazi hiyo waliondoa. Kazi yetu ilikuwa ni kuamua kuanzia hisia 20, ambayo kwa awali ilikuja na twita. Seti mbili zilitolewa - moja kwa lugha ya Kiingereza na nyingine kwa Kihispania. Tulifanya kazi hiyo kama kazi ya usambazaji wa kawaida na hisia za hisia kama darasa zetu na twiti kama nyaraka zetu. Mfumo wetu bora wa utendaji ulitumia mtindo wa maneno na mashine ya msaidizi wa Linear Wizara kama mwangazaji wake. Tumefanikiwa takwimu la F1 kwa asilimia 32.73 za takwimu za Kiingereza na asilimia 17.98 kwa takwimu za Kihispania.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، سیستم خود را برای تهیه کردن یک ایموجی به یک تویت بر اساس متن نشان می دهیم. هر توئیت در ابتدا با ایموجی که پردازگاران وظیفه\u200cای از آن برداشته می\u200cشد. وظیفه ما این بود که تصمیم بگیریم از ۲۰ emojis که در ابتدا با تویت آمد. دو مجموعه داده شده - یکی به انگلیسی و یکی به اسپانیایی. ما این وظیفه را به عنوان یک وظیفه جدایی استاندارد با ایموجیس به عنوان کلاس\u200cهای ما و توئیت\u200cها به عنوان سند\u200cهای ما رفتار کردیم. بهترین سیستم اجرای ما از یک بسته کلمه استفاده کرد با یک ماشین پشتیبانی ویکتور لینی به عنوان کلاسیفش. ما یک نمونه ماکرو F1 از 32.73 درصد برای داده های انگلیسی و 17.98 درصد برای داده های اسپانیایی به دست آوردیم.', 'ko': "본고에서 우리는 텍스트를 바탕으로 추문에 이모티콘을 분배하는 시스템을 소개했다.모든 추문은 처음에 이모티콘을 발표했고, 작업 제공자는 이를 삭제했다.우리의 임무는 20개의 표정 중 하나를 고르는 것이다. 이 20개의 표정은 처음에 트위터와 함께 등장했다.두 개의 데이터 집합을 제공했다. 하나는 영어이고, 다른 하나는 스페인어이다.우리는 이 임무를 표준적인 분류 임무로 보고 표정을 우리의 종류로 하고 추문을 우리의 문서로 삼는다.우리의 성능이 가장 좋은 시스템은 포켓 모형을 사용하고, 선형 지원 벡터기를 '분류기'로 사용한다.우리는 32.73%의 영어 데이터와 17.98%의 스페인어 데이터에 대한 거시적 F1 점수를 얻었다.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda sistemamyzy metin üstünde bir emoji taýýarlamak üçin sungatdyrys. Her týuter başlangıçda täze teminatçileriniň çykaryşlarynyň emoji bilen gönderildi. Bizim görevimiz 20 emojis'den çözmek, başlangıçta tweet ile geldi. Iki sany gurşaw berildi - bir iňlisçe we beýleki iňlisçe. Biz bu zady emojislerimiz klaslarımız we tweetlerimiz şeklinde standart klasifikasyon görevi şeklinde düşündük. Biziň iň gowy etjek sistemimiz çyzgyly bir söz nusgasyny çyzgyly bir wektor maşyny klasifikatçy bilen ulandy. Biz Iňlisçe maglumatlar üçin 32,73% we 17,98% Ispanýol maglumatlary üçin makro F1 sanyny tapdyk.", 'af': "In hierdie papier, laat ons stelsel voorsien om 'n emoji a an 'n tweet gebaseer op die teks te wys. Elke tweet was oorspronklik met 'n emoji wat die taak verskaffer verwyder is. Ons taak was om uit 20 emojis te besluit, wat oorspronklik met die tweet gekom het. Twee datastel is verskaf - een in Engels en die ander in Spaanse. Ons het die taak as 'n standaard klassifikasie taak behandel met die emojis as ons klasse en die tweets as ons dokumente. Ons beste uitvoerde stelsel het 'n Bag van woorde model gebruik met 'n Linear ondersteun vektor masjien as sy 'klassifiseerder. Ons het 'n makro F1 aantal 32.73% vir die Engelse data en 17.98% vir die Spaanse data bereik.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች፣ የኢሜጂን ደብዳቤን በመጽሐፉ ላይ ለመጠቀም እናቀርባለን፡፡ Each tweet was originally posted with an emoji which the task providers removed.  ስራችን በመጀመሪያ በትዊተር የመጣውን ከ20 ኢሜጂ መፍጠር ነው፡፡ ሁለት ዳታ ሳጥን - አንዱ በንግግሊዝኛ አንዱም በስፓኒስኛ ተሰጥቷል፡፡ ሥርዓቱን እንደ ተቃውሞ ትርጉም እንዳደረግነው ኢሜጂን እና ትዊተሮችን እንደ ሰነጃዎቻችን አቀረብን፡፡ የተሻለ የስርዓት ስርዓት የቃላት ምሳሌ የተጠቀመ የቋንቋ ደጋሚ መሳሳይ ነው፡፡ ለኢንግሊዝኛ ዳታ 32.73 በመቶ ማክሮ F1 መስኮት አግኝተናል፡፡ ለስፓኒሽ ዳታዎችም 17.98 በመቶ አግኝተናል፡፡', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim sistemin tonë për të caktuar një emoji në një tweet bazuar në tekst. Each tweet was originally posted with an emoji which the task providers removed.  Detyra jonë ishte të vendosim nga 20 emoxhi, që fillimisht erdhi me tweetin. U ofruan dy grupe të dhënash - një në anglisht dhe tjetri në spanjoll. We treated the task as a standard classification task with the emojis as our classes and the tweets as our documents.  Sistemi ynë më i mirë përfaqësues përdori një model me një çantë fjalësh me një mekanizëm të mbështetjes lineare Vektori si klasifikues i saj. Ne arritëm një rezultat makro F1 prej 32.73% për të dhënat angleze dhe 17.98% për të dhënat spanjolle.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր համակարգը, որպեսզի էմոջին տրամադրենք տեքստի վրա հիմնված թվիթին: Յուրաքանչյուր թվիթ սկզբում տեղադրվել էր մի էմոջի հետ, որը հանել էին առաջադրանքների պարտադրողները: Մեր առաջադրանքն էր որոշել 20 էմոջայից, որը սկզբում թվիթերի հետ էր: Երկու տվյալներ տրամադրվել էին՝ մեկը անգլերենով, իսկ մյուսը՝ իսպաներենով: Մենք այս խնդիրը վերաբերեցինք որպես ստանդարտ դասակարգման խնդիր էմոջայի հետ, որպես մեր դասեր և թվիթեր որպես փաստաթղթեր: Մեր լավագույն արդյունավետ համակարգը որպես դասակարգիչ օգտագործեց բառերի պայուսակի մոդել գծային աջակցության մեքենայով: Մենք հասանք անգլերենի տվյալների 32.73 տոկոսի մակարո F1 գնահատականի և իսպաներեն 17.98 տոկոսի:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, məktuba dayanan emoji təyin etmək üçün sistemimizi göstəririk. Hər tweet ilk dəfə emoji ilə göndərildi ki, işlər təmin edənlərin alındığı emoji ilə. Bizim işimiz 20 emojis-dən qərar vermək idi. Bu, ilk dəfə tweet ilə gəldi. İki veri qurğuları – bir İngilizce, digərini İspanyolca təmin edildi. Biz bu işi emoji ilə standart klasifikasiya görevi kimi, sınıflarımız və tweetlərimiz belə etdik. Bizim ən yaxşı performans sistemimiz Linear Support Vector Makinasını klasifikatçı kimi Sözlər Modelini kullandı. Biz İngilizce məlumatları üçün 32,73% makro F1 nöqtəsini qəbul etdik və İspanyol məlumatları üçün 17,98%.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা আমাদের সিস্টেমের সামনে উপস্থাপন করছি এই টুইটে ভিত্তিক একটি ইমোজিকে টুইট করার জন্য। প্রত্যেক টুইট প্রথমে একটি ইমোজির সাথে পোস্ট করা হয়েছিল যার কাজ প্রদানকারীরা অপসারণ করেছিল। আমাদের কাজ ছিল ২০ ইমেজিক থেকে সিদ্ধান্ত নিতে, যা প্রথমে টুইট করেছিল। দুই ডাটাসেট প্রদান করা হয়েছে - একটি ইংরেজী এবং অন্যটি স্প্যানিশ ভাষায়। আমরা এই কাজটিকে স্বাভাবিক শ্রেণী হিসেবে চিকিৎসা করেছি আমাদের ক্লাস এবং টুইট আমাদের ডকুমেন্ট হিসেবে। আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনী সিস্টেম একটি ব্যাগ অফ ওয়ার্ড মডেল ব্যবহার করেছে লাইনিয়ার সমর্থন ভেক্টর মেশিনের মাধ্যমে এট ইংরেজি তথ্য এবং স্প্যানিশ তথ্যের জন্য ১৭. ৯৮% ম্যাক্রো এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করেছি।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš sistem za dodavanje emoji tweetu na temelju teksta. Svaki tweet je prvi put postavljen emoji koji su pružatelji zadataka uklonili. Naš zadatak je bio odlučiti od 20 emojis, koji je prvo došao sa tweetom. Dvije podatke su pružene - jedna na engleskom i druga na španjolskom. Poslužili smo zadatak kao standardnu klasifikaciju sa emojima kao časove i tweets kao naši dokumenti. Naš najbolji izvršni sistem je koristio model vrećice riječi sa linijskom sektorskom mašinom za njegovu klasifikaciju. Postigli smo makro F1 rezultat od 32,73% za engleske podatke i 17,98% za španjolske podatke.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem el nostre sistema per assenyar un emoji a un tweet basat en el text. Cada tweet va ser publicat amb un emoji que els proveïdors de tasques van eliminar. La nostra tasca va ser decidir de cada 20 emoji, que originalment va venir amb el tweet. Es van proporcionar dos conjunts de dades - un en anglès i l'altre en espanyol. Vam tractar la tasca com una tasca de classificació normal amb els emoji com les nostres classes i els tweets com els nostres documents. El nostre sistema de millor rendiment va utilitzar un model de Bag of Words amb una Màquina de Suport Linear Vector com a classificador. Vam aconseguir una puntuació macro F1 del 32,73% per a les dades angleses i del 17,98% per a les dades espanyoles.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme náš systém pro přiřazení emoji tweetu na základě textu. Každý tweet byl původně zveřejněn s emoji, které poskytovatelé úkolů odstranili. Naším úkolem bylo rozhodnout se z dvaceti emoji, které původně přišly s tweetem. Byly poskytnuty dva datové sady, jeden v angličtině a druhý ve španělštině. Úkol jsme považovali za standardní klasifikační úkol s emoji jako naše třídy a tweety jako naše dokumenty. Náš nejlépe výkonný systém použil model Bag of Words s lineárním podporovým vektorovým strojem jako klasifikátor. Dosáhli jsme makro F1 skóre 32,73% pro anglická data a 17,98% pro španělská data.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis tutvustame meie süsteemi emojide määramiseks säutsu teksti põhjal. Iga säutsu postitati algselt emojiga, mille ülesandepakkujad eemaldasid. Meie ülesanne oli otsustada 20 emojist, mis algselt tuli koos tweetiga. Esitati kaks andmekogumit - üks inglise ja teine hispaania keeles. Me käsitlesime ülesannet standardse klassifitseerimisülesandena, emojid olid meie klassid ja säutsud meie dokumendid. Meie parima tulemusega süsteem kasutas Bag of Words mudelit, mille klassifitseerijana oli lineaarne tugi vektorimasin. Me saavutasime makro F1 skoori 32,73% inglise ja 17,98% Hispaania andmete puhul.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme järjestelmämme, jolla twiitille voidaan määrittää emoji tekstin perusteella. Jokaisessa twiitissä oli alun perin emoji, jonka tehtävien tarjoajat poistivat. Tehtävämme oli päättää 20 emojista, jotka alun perin tulivat twiitin mukana. Toimitettiin kaksi aineistoa - toinen englanniksi ja toinen espanjaksi. Käsittelimme tehtävää vakiona luokittelutehtävänä, jossa emojit olivat luokkamme ja tweetit dokumenttimme. Parhaiten suorituskykyinen järjestelmämme käytti Bag of Words -mallia, jonka luokittelijana oli Linear Support Vector Machine. Saavutimme F1-makropisteen 32,73% englanninkielisille tiedoille ja 17,98% espanjalaisille tiedoille.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da tsarin mu da za'a gaura wani Emji zuwa wani littãfi na'ura. An originally posted each Twitter with an Emji wanda ke tafiyar da aikin da shi. Kayinmu na zaɓe ta daga 20 hejiki, wanda ya zo na farko da Twitter. @ info: whatsthis Ba mu yi aikin abin da ya zama mai taƙaita wa fassarar daraja da mutane da takardan mu. @ action We achieved a macro F1 score of 32.73% for the English data and 17.98% for the Spanish data.", 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את המערכת שלנו להזמין אמוג'י לטוויט מבוסס על הטקסט. כל טוויט הופיע במקור עם אימוג'י שהסיפקים של המשימה הוסרו. המשימה שלנו היתה להחליט מתוך 20 אמוג'ים, שהגיעו במקור עם הטוויט. שני קבוצות נתונים נאספו - אחד באנגלית והשני בספרדית. התייחסנו למשימה כמשימה מסווג סטנדרטית עם האמוג'יס ככייתנו והטוויטים כמסמכים שלנו. מערכת ההופעה הטובה ביותר שלנו השתמשה במודל שקית מילים עם מכונת ויקטור תמיכה לינרית כמקליזת שלה. השגנו נקודת מקרו F1 של 32.73% עבור הנתונים האנגליים ו-17.98% עבור הנתונים הספרדיים.", 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predstavljamo naš sistem za dodeljevanje emojija tweetu na podlagi besedila. Vsak tweet je bil prvotno objavljen z emojijem, ki so ga ponudniki opravil odstranili. Naša naloga je bila, da se odločimo od 20 emojijev, ki so prvotno prišli s tweetom. Zagotovljena sta bila dva nabora podatkov – eden v angleščini in drugi v španščini. Naloga smo obravnavali kot standardno opravilo klasifikacije z emojiji kot našimi razredi in tweeti kot naši dokumenti. Naš najboljši sistem je uporabljal model Bag of Words z linearnim podpornim vektorskim strojem kot klasifikatorjem. Za angleške podatke smo dosegli makro rezultat F1 32,73% in za španske podatke 17,98%.', 'jv': 'Nang mapun iki, kita nyibagi sistem kanggo nyeleh e nemoji kanggo tuwit sing bisa nyeleh ning teks. Tuwit sampeyan wis ngupakan sedhaya karo emuji sing nganggo perusahaan task nang nggawe Rasané awak dhéwé wis ngerasah éwé éntuk awak dhéwé, nik uwis seneng tuwit. Sampeyan dataset duwe wis ngewehku - saben kanggo Inggris lan saben Kasian. Monday Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing wis nggawe "bag of words model" karo "Linesupported vector" gampang Awak dhéwé wis ngerasai macro F1 sing kelas 32.75% kanggo dadi Inggris lan 19.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་emoji་ཞིག་འཇུག་སར་བཅུག་པ་རེད། འགོ་འཛུགས་པ་རེ་རེའི་དྲ་ཐོག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་emoji སྤྱད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་emojis p20ལས་གདམ་གསེས་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་རེད། དེ་ནི་འགོ་བཙུགས་དུས་ཐོག་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད། སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བྱིན་ཡོད། སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་ན་གཞན་ཞིག་དང་འདྲ་བྱས་ཏེ། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ལས་འགུལ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་འཛིན་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་རྩོལ་བ་ཞིག་བྱ ང་ཚོའི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་མ་ལག་གིས་སྔོན་ཤོས་བྱས་པའི་ཐུམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཅིག་སྤྱོད་པ་ལས་(Bag of Words)རྩིས་གཞི་ལྟར ང་ཚོ་ཨིན་ཡིག་གི་གནས་སྡུད་དང་། ས་ཁེར་ཡིག་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་མ་རིས་༡༧.98%'}
{'en': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'ar': 'THU_NGN في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: شبكة CNN-LSTM المتبقية مع الاهتمام بتنبؤ الرموز التعبيرية باللغة الإنجليزية', 'fr': 'THU_NGN à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Réseau CNN-LSTM résiduel avec une attention particulière pour la prédiction des emoji en anglais', 'pt': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Rede CNN-LSTM residual com atenção para previsão de emojis em inglês', 'es': 'THU_NGN en SemEval-2018 Tarea 2: Red CNN-LSTM residual con atención para la predicción de emoji en inglés', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のTHU_NGNタスク2 ：英語の絵文字予測に注目したCNN - LSTMネットワークの残存', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 टास्क 2 पर THU_NGN: अंग्रेजी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी के लिए ध्यान के साथ अवशिष्ट सीएनएन-एलएसटीएम नेटवर्क', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务2 THU_NGN:残CNN-LSTM网络,英语表情符号占', 'ru': 'THU_NGN на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Остаточная сеть CNN-LSTM с вниманием к прогнозированию английских эмодзи', 'ga': 'THU_NGN ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Líonra CNN-LSTM Iarmharach le Aird ar Thuar Emoji Béarla', 'ka': 'THU', 'hu': 'THU_NGN a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: maradék CNN-LSTM hálózat figyelemmel az angol emoji jóslásra', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: Υπόλειμμα Δίκτυο με προσοχή για την πρόβλεψη των Αγγλικών Εμόζι', 'it': 'THU_NGN al SemEval-2018 Task 2: Rete CNN-LSTM residua con attenzione alla previsione Emoji inglese', 'mk': 'THU_NGN на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Резидентна мрежа CNN-LSTM со внимание на англиската емои предвидување', 'kk': 'THU_NGN at semiEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with attention to English Emoji Prediction', 'lt': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 2 užduotis: CNN-LSTM tinklas, kuriame dėmesys skiriamas anglų Emoji prognozei', 'mt': 'THU_NGN f’SemEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'mn': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'ms': 'THU_NGN pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Rangkaian CNN-LSTM sisa dengan perhatian untuk Prediksi Emoji Inggeris', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2- ല്\u200d THU_ NGN: ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് എമോജി മുന്\u200dഗണന്റിനുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധയോടെ വീണ്ടും സിNN- LSTM ശൃംഖലം', 'pl': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Pozostała sieć CNN-LSTM z uwzględnieniem angielskiej prognozy emoji', 'no': 'THU_NGN at semiEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'ro': 'THU_NGN la SemEval-2018 Task 2: Rețeaua reziduală CNN-LSTM cu atenție pentru predicția emoji engleză', 'sr': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 Task 2: Ostatak CNN-LSTM mreža sa pažnjom za predviđanje engleskog Emojija', 'si': 'THU_NGN at semeval-2018 Job 2: residual CNN-LSTM network with Attension for English Emosis Precdiction', 'so': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'sv': 'THU_NGN på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Resterande CNN-LSTM nätverk med uppmärksamhet för engelsk emoji förutsägelse', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018ல் THU_ NGN பணி 2: ஆங்கிலத்தின் Emoji முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifani 2: Inglizcha Emoji Prediction uchun umumiy CNN-LSTM tarmoq', 'vi': 'Đây là công việc bắt đầu từ kênh kênh cung cấp trung ương trung ương Name', 'nl': 'THU_NGN op SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Residueel CNN-LSTM Netwerk met aandacht voor Engelse Emoji Voorspelling', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Остатъчна мрежа с внимание за прогнозиране на английски емоджи', 'hr': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Ostatak CNN-LSTM mreže s pažnjom za predviđanje engleskog Emojija', 'da': 'THU_NGN på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Rest CNN-LSTM netværk med opmærksomhed på engelsk emoji forudsigelse', 'id': 'THU_NGN di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Jaringan CNN-LSTM sisa dengan perhatian untuk Prediksi Emoji Inggris', 'ko': 'THU NGN이SemEval-18 퀘스트 2: 영어 표정 예측에 주목하는 남은 CNN-LSTM 네트워크', 'de': 'THU_NGN bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Restnetz CNN-LSTM mit Aufmerksamkeit für englische Emoji-Vorhersagen', 'fa': 'THU_NGN در ماموریت ۲: شبکه CNN-LSTM باقی مانده با توجه به پیشنهاد اموژی انگلیسی', 'sw': 'THU_NGN kwenye SemEval-2018 Kazi 2: Mtandao wa Huduma wa CNN-LSTM kwa hisia za Kiingereza Utawala wa Emoji', 'af': 'THU_NGN by SemEval-2018 Taak 2: oorblyfstelsel CNN-LSTM Netwerk met aandag vir Engelse Emoji voorvloediging', 'tr': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'sq': 'THU_NGN në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'hy': 'THU_NCN-ը, 2018-ի կիսագնդի 2. հանձնարարությունը. CNN-LStm ցանց մնացած, ուշադրություն դարձնելով անգլերեն էմոյի կանխատեսման համար', 'az': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ২-এ থিউ_NGN: ইংরেজি এমোজি প্রেমিশনের জন্য প্রতিবাদ সিএনএন-LSTM নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ করুন', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'ca': 'THU_NGN a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction', 'cs': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Zbytková CNN-LSTM síť s pozorností pro anglickou předpověď emoji', 'et': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 ülesandel 2: CNN-LSTM võrgustik koos tähelepanu inglise emoji prognoosile', 'bs': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 Task 2: Ostatak CNN-LSTM mreža s pažnjom za predviđanje engleskog Emojija', 'fi': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Jäljellä oleva CNN-LSTM-verkosto, jossa huomioidaan englanninkielinen emoji-ennuste', 'he': 'THU_NGN ב SemEval-2018 משימה 2: רשת CNN-LSTM שארית עם תשומת לב לטיפול אמואי אנגלי', 'sk': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 naloga 2: Preostalo omrežje CNN-LSTM s pozornostjo za napoved angleških emojijev', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'jv': 'thoU_NGN at semiinval-2020', 'bo': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Residual CNN-LSTM Network with Attention for English Emoji Prediction'}
{'en': 'Emojis are widely used by social media and social network users when posting their messages. It is important to study the relationships between messages and emojis. Thus, in SemEval-2018 Task 2 an interesting and challenging task is proposed, i.e., predicting which emojis are evoked by text-based tweets. We propose a residual CNN-LSTM with attention (RCLA) model for this task. Our model combines CNN and LSTM layers to capture both local and long-range contextual information for tweet representation. In addition, attention mechanism is used to select important components. Besides, residual connection is applied to CNN layers to facilitate the training of neural networks. We also incorporated additional features such as POS tags and sentiment features extracted from lexicons. Our model achieved 30.25 % macro-averaged F-score in the first subtask (i.e., emoji prediction in English), ranking 7th out of 48 participants.RCLA) model\n      for this task. Our model combines CNN and LSTM layers to capture\n      both local and long-range contextual information for tweet\n      representation.  In addition, attention mechanism is used to\n      select important components.  Besides, residual connection is\n      applied to CNN layers to facilitate the training of neural\n      networks. We also incorporated additional features such as POS\n      tags and sentiment features extracted from lexicons. Our model\n      achieved 30.25% macro-averaged F-score in the first subtask\n      (i.e., emoji prediction in English), ranking 7th out of 48\n      participants.\n    ', 'ar': 'يستخدم مستخدمو وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي والشبكات الاجتماعية الرموز التعبيرية على نطاق واسع عند نشر رسائلهم. من المهم دراسة العلاقات بين الرسائل والرموز التعبيرية. وبالتالي ، في SemEval-2018 Task 2 ، تم اقتراح مهمة شيقة وصعبة ، أي التنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية التي تثيرها التغريدات المستندة إلى النص. نقترح نموذج CNN-LSTM المتبقي مع الاهتمام (RCLA) لهذه المهمة. يجمع نموذجنا بين طبقات CNN و LSTM لالتقاط كل من المعلومات السياقية المحلية والبعيدة المدى لتمثيل التغريدات. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يتم استخدام آلية الانتباه لاختيار المكونات الهامة. إلى جانب ذلك ، يتم تطبيق الاتصال المتبقي على طبقات CNN لتسهيل تدريب الشبكات العصبية. قمنا أيضًا بدمج ميزات إضافية مثل علامات نقاط البيع وميزات المشاعر المستخرجة من المعاجم. حقق نموذجنا 30.25٪ متوسط درجة ماكرو F في المهمة الفرعية الأولى (على سبيل المثال ، توقع الرموز التعبيرية باللغة الإنجليزية) ، واحتل المرتبة السابعة من بين 48 مشاركًا.', 'es': 'Los emojis son ampliamente utilizados por los usuarios de redes sociales y redes sociales cuando publican sus mensajes. Es importante estudiar las relaciones entre los mensajes y los emojis. Por lo tanto, en la Tarea 2 de SemEval-2018 se propone una tarea interesante y desafiante, es decir, predecir qué emojis evocan los tuits basados en texto. Proponemos un modelo residual de CNN-LSTM con atención (RCLA) para esta tarea. Nuestro modelo combina capas de CNN y LSTM para capturar información contextual local y de largo alcance para la representación de tuits. Además, el mecanismo de atención se utiliza para seleccionar componentes importantes. Además, la conexión residual se aplica a las capas de CNN para facilitar el entrenamiento de las redes neuronales. También incorporamos funciones adicionales, como etiquetas de PDV y funciones de opinión extraídas de léxicos. Nuestro modelo logró una puntuación F macromedia del 30,25% en la primera subtarea (es decir, predicción de emojis en inglés), ocupando el séptimo lugar de los 48 participantes.', 'pt': 'Os emojis são amplamente utilizados por usuários de mídias sociais e redes sociais ao postar suas mensagens. É importante estudar as relações entre mensagens e emojis. Assim, na Tarefa 2 do SemEval-2018 é proposta uma tarefa interessante e desafiadora, ou seja, prever quais emojis são evocados por tweets baseados em texto. Propomos um modelo residual CNN-LSTM com atenção (RCLA) para esta tarefa. Nosso modelo combina camadas CNN e LSTM para capturar informações contextuais locais e de longo alcance para representação de tweets. Além disso, o mecanismo de atenção é usado para selecionar componentes importantes. Além disso, a conexão residual é aplicada às camadas CNN para facilitar o treinamento das redes neurais. Também incorporamos recursos adicionais, como tags POS e recursos de sentimento extraídos de léxicos. Nosso modelo alcançou 30,25% de pontuação F com média macro na primeira subtarefa (ou seja, previsão de emoji em inglês), ocupando o 7º lugar entre 48 participantes.', 'fr': "Les émojis sont largement utilisés par les utilisateurs des réseaux sociaux et des réseaux sociaux lorsqu'ils publient leurs messages. Il est important d'étudier les relations entre les messages et les émojis. Ainsi, dans SemeVal-2018 Task 2, une tâche intéressante et stimulante est proposée, c'est-à-dire prédire quels émojis sont évoqués par des tweets textuels. Nous proposons un modèle CNN-LSTM avec attention (RCLA) résiduel pour cette tâche. Notre modèle combine des couches CNN et LSTM pour capturer des informations contextuelles locales et à long terme pour la représentation des tweets. En outre, le mécanisme d'attention est utilisé pour sélectionner des composants importants. En outre, la connexion résiduelle est appliquée aux couches CNN pour faciliter l'entraînement des réseaux de neurones. Nous avons également intégré des fonctionnalités supplémentaires telles que les balises POS et les fonctionnalités de sentiment extraites de lexiques. Notre modèle a obtenu un score F macro-moyen de 30,25\xa0% dans la première sous-tâche (c'est-à-dire la prédiction d'emoji en anglais), se classant 7e sur 48 participants.", 'ja': '絵文字は、ソーシャルメディアやソーシャルネットワークユーザーがメッセージを投稿する際に広く使用されています。メッセージと絵文字の関係を調べることが重要です。したがって、SemEval -2018タスク2では、テキストベースのツイートによってどの絵文字が呼び出されるかを予測する、興味深くて困難なタスクが提案されています。このタスクのために、注意を払った残留CNN - LSTM （ RCLA ）モデルを提案します。当社のモデルは、CNNとLSTMレイヤーを組み合わせて、ツイート表現のためのローカルおよび長距離のコンテキスト情報の両方をキャプチャします。さらに、注意メカニズムを使用して、重要なコンポーネントを選択します。さらに、残存接続は、ニューラルネットワークのトレーニングを容易にするためにCNN層に適用される。また、POSタグや辞書から抽出されたセンチメント機能などの追加機能も組み込まれました。私たちのモデルは、最初のサブタスク（英語の絵文字予測）で30.25 ％のマクロ平均Fスコアを達成し、48人の参加者のうち7位でした。', 'ru': 'Эмодзи широко используются пользователями социальных сетей и соцсетей при публикации своих сообщений. Важно изучить взаимосвязи между сообщениями и эмодзи. Таким образом, в Задаче 2 SemEval-2018 предлагается интересная и сложная задача, т.е. прогнозирование того, какие эмодзи вызываются текстовыми твитами. Для этой задачи мы предлагаем остаточную модель CNN-LSTM с вниманием (RCLA). Наша модель объединяет слои CNN и LSTM для захвата как локальной, так и долгосрочной контекстной информации для представления твитов. Кроме того, механизм внимания используется для выбора важных компонентов. Кроме того, остаточное соединение применяется к слоям CNN для облегчения обучения нейронных сетей. Мы также включили дополнительные функции, такие как POS-теги и функции настроений, извлеченные из лексиконов. В первой подзадаче (то есть прогнозирование эмодзи на английском языке) наша модель достигла 30,25% макроусредненного F-балла, заняв 7-е место из 48 участников.', 'zh': '表情符号为社交媒体和社交网络用户宣布广用。 治消息表情符号之际甚重。 是以SemEval-2018务2中,发一趣而有挑战性,即占文本之推文会何表情符号也。 余CNN-LSTM与注意(RCLA)模。 合 CNN 与 LSTM ,以获本远程上下文,以推文其义。 此外,机制用择要组件。 此外,残差接用于CNN层,以促神经网络之教。 又整合他功能, POS 标取词典情。 首事(英语表情符号占)得30.25%宏观均F分,排名第7名于48名参与者。', 'hi': 'इमोजी का व्यापक रूप से उपयोग सोशल मीडिया और सोशल नेटवर्क उपयोगकर्ताओं द्वारा किया जाता है जब वे अपने संदेश पोस्ट करते हैं। संदेशों और इमोजी के बीच संबंधों का अध्ययन करना महत्वपूर्ण है। इस प्रकार, SemEval-2018 टास्क 2 में एक दिलचस्प और चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य प्रस्तावित किया गया है, यानी, यह भविष्यवाणी करते हुए कि पाठ-आधारित ट्वीट्स द्वारा कौन से इमोजी उत्पन्न किए जाते हैं। हम इस कार्य के लिए ध्यान (आरसीएलए) मॉडल के साथ एक अवशिष्ट सीएनएन-एलएसटीएम का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल सीएनएन और एलएसटीएम परतों को जोड़ता है ताकि ट्वीट प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए स्थानीय और लंबी दूरी की प्रासंगिक जानकारी दोनों पर कब्जा किया जा सके। इसके अलावा, महत्वपूर्ण घटकों का चयन करने के लिए ध्यान तंत्र का उपयोग किया जाता है। इसके अलावा, अवशिष्ट कनेक्शन को तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के प्रशिक्षण की सुविधा के लिए सीएनएन परतों पर लागू किया जाता है। हमने अतिरिक्त सुविधाओं जैसे पीओएस टैग और शब्दकोशों से निकाली गई भावना सुविधाओं को भी शामिल किया। हमारे मॉडल ने पहले सबटास्क (यानी, अंग्रेजी में इमोजी भविष्यवाणी) में 30.25% मैक्रो-औसत एफ-स्कोर हासिल किया, जो 48 प्रतिभागियों में से 7 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ga': 'Úsáideann úsáideoirí na meán sóisialta agus líonraí sóisialta emojis go forleathan agus iad ag postáil a dteachtaireachtaí. Tá sé tábhachtach staidéar a dhéanamh ar na caidrimh idir teachtaireachtaí agus emojis. Mar sin, i dTasc 2 SemEval-2018 moltar tasc suimiúil agus dúshlánach, is é sin, réamh-mheas a dhéanamh ar na emojis a tharraingítear chun solais le tvuíteanna téacsbhunaithe. Molaimid múnla iarmharach CNN-LSTM le haird (RCLA) don tasc seo. Comhcheanglaíonn ár múnla sraitheanna CNN agus LSTM chun faisnéis chomhthéacsúil áitiúil agus fadraoin a ghabháil le haghaidh ionadaíocht tweet. Ina theannta sin, úsáidtear meicníocht aird chun comhpháirteanna tábhachtacha a roghnú. Ina theannta sin, cuirtear nasc iarmharach i bhfeidhm ar shraitheanna CNN chun oiliúint líonraí néaracha a éascú. Ionchorpraíomar freisin gnéithe breise cosúil le clibeanna POS agus gnéithe meon a bhaintear as foclóirí. Bhain ár múnla 30.25% macra-scór-F amach sa chéad fhothasc (i.e. tuar emoji i mBéarla), sa 7ú háit as 48 rannpháirtí.', 'el': 'Τα χρησιμοποιούνται ευρέως από χρήστες κοινωνικών μέσων και κοινωνικών δικτύων όταν δημοσιεύουν τα μηνύματά τους. Είναι σημαντικό να μελετήσετε τις σχέσεις μεταξύ μηνυμάτων και emoji. Έτσι, στην εργασία 2 προτείνεται μια ενδιαφέρουσα και προκλητική εργασία, δηλαδή η πρόβλεψη των emojis που προκαλούνται από τα γραπτά tweets. Προτείνουμε ένα υπόλειμμα μοντέλο με προσοχή για την εργασία αυτή. Το μοντέλο μας συνδυάζει στρώματα για να συλλάβει τοπικές και μεγάλης εμβέλειας πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος για την αναπαράσταση tweets. Επιπλέον, ο μηχανισμός προσοχής χρησιμοποιείται για την επιλογή σημαντικών συστατικών. Εκτός αυτού, η υπολειμματική σύνδεση εφαρμόζεται στα στρώματα για να διευκολύνει την εκπαίδευση των νευρωνικών δικτύων. Επίσης ενσωματώσαμε πρόσθετα χαρακτηριστικά όπως ετικέτες και χαρακτηριστικά συναισθημάτων που εξάγονται από λεξικά. Το μοντέλο μας πέτυχε 30,25% μακρομέση βαθμολογία στην πρώτη υποταγή (π.χ., πρόβλεψη στα αγγλικά), με την 7η από τους 48 συμμετέχοντες.', 'ka': 'ემოზიები სოციალური მედია და სოციალური ქსელის მომხმარებელი გამოყენება, როდესაც მათი შეტყობინებები გადატანა. მნიშვნელოვანია შეტყობინებების და ემოიზების შორის შესახებების შესახებ. ამიტომ, SemEval-2018 დავალებში ორი ინტერესური და გასაკვეთებელი დავალება იგივეა, რომელიც ტექსტის გადატანებული tweets გამოიყენება. ჩვენ მივეღებთ CNN-LSTM მოდელს, რომელიც ამ დავალებისთვის მოდულია. ჩვენი მოდელი CNN და LSTM მონაცემები გაერთიანს, რომ ორივე ლოკალური და დიდ განზომის კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია გადატანოთ. დამატებით, მონიშვნელოვანი მექანსი გამოყენება მნიშვნელოვანი კომპონენტების ამორჩევისთვის. დამატებით, CNN-ს ჩატვირთებისთვის დამატებული დაკავშირება დაყენებულია, რომ ნეიროლური ქსელების განაკვირთების შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ ასევე დამატებული ფუნქციები, როგორც POS ჭდეები და სენტიმენტის ფუნქციები, რომლებიც ლექსიკონდან გამოიყენებული. ჩვენი მოდელი 30,25% მაკრო განსაზღვრებული F-score წარმოდგენა პირველი საკითხვაში (მაგალითად, ემოჯია წარმოდგენა ინგლისურად), რომელიც 48-დან შვიდი წარმოდგენა.', 'hu': 'Az emojikat széles körben használják a közösségi média és a közösségi hálózat felhasználók, amikor üzeneteiket közzéteszik. Fontos tanulmányozni az üzenetek és az emojik közötti kapcsolatokat. Így a SemEval-2018 Task 2-ben érdekes és kihívást jelentő feladatot javasolunk, azaz megjósoljuk, hogy mely emojikat idéznek elő szövegalapú tweetek. Ehhez a feladathoz javasoljuk a maradék CNN-LSTM figyelemmel (RCLA) rendelkező modellt. Modellünk kombinálja a CNN és LSTM rétegeket, hogy mind a helyi, mind a hosszú távú kontextuális információkat rögzítse a tweet megjelenítéséhez. Ezenkívül a figyelem mechanizmusát használják a fontos összetevők kiválasztására. Emellett a maradék kapcsolatot a CNN rétegekre alkalmazzák, hogy megkönnyítsék az ideghálózatok kiképzését. További funkciókat is beépítettünk, mint például a POS címkék és a lexikonokból kivont sentiment funkciók. Modellünk 30,25%-os makro-átlagos F pontszámot ért el az első részfeladatban (azaz angolul emoji előrejelzés), 48 résztvevő közül a 7. helyen.', 'it': "Le emoji sono ampiamente utilizzate dagli utenti dei social media e dei social network quando pubblicano i loro messaggi. È importante studiare le relazioni tra messaggi ed emoji. Così, in SemEval-2018 Task 2 viene proposto un compito interessante e impegnativo, cioè prevedere quali emoji sono evocati da tweet testuali. Per questo compito proponiamo un modello CNN-LSTM residuo con attenzione (RCLA). Il nostro modello combina livelli CNN e LSTM per acquisire informazioni contestuali locali e a lungo raggio per la rappresentazione dei tweet. Inoltre, il meccanismo di attenzione viene utilizzato per selezionare componenti importanti. Inoltre, la connessione residua viene applicata agli strati CNN per facilitare l'addestramento delle reti neurali. Abbiamo anche incorporato funzionalità aggiuntive come tag POS e funzionalità sentiment estratte dai lessici. Il nostro modello ha ottenuto un punteggio F macro-medio del 30,25% nella prima sottomissione (cioè predizione emoji in inglese), classificandosi settimo su 48 partecipanti.", 'kk': 'Хаттарды жіберу кезінде көңіл көңіл медиақтар мен әлемді желі пайдаланушылар көп қолданылады. Хаттар мен эмозиялар арасындағы қатынастарды зерттеу маңызды. Бұл үшін, 2-нің semiEval-2018 тапсырмасында бір қызықты және шақыру тапсырманы ұсынады, яғни мәтін негіздеген tweets- тізбектерінің көңіл күйін тапсырмалау үшін. Бұл тапсырманың қалдық CNN-LSTM үлгісін (RCLA) үлгісін қолданамыз. Біздің үлгіміз CNN және LSTM қабаттарын tweet келтіріміз үшін жергілікті және ұзын ауқымды мәліметті алу үшін біріктіреді. Қосымша, маңызды компоненттерді таңдау үшін назар механизмі қолданылады. Келесіден қалдық қосылым CNN қабаттарына невралды желілерді оқыту үшін қолданылады. Сонымен қатар, Лексикондан шығарылған POS тегтері мен сезімдік мүмкіндіктері секілді қосымша мүмкіндіктерді қосып тастадық. Біздің үлгіміз алғашқы суреттің 30,25% макроортасындағы F- нәтижесін жеткізді (мысалы, ағылшын тілінде эмодж прогнозы), 48 қатысушылардан 7- нәтижесі болды.', 'lt': 'Socialinės žiniasklaidos ir socialinių tinklų naudotojai plačiai naudoja Emojis skelbiant savo pranešimus. Svarbu ištirti pranešimų ir emodžių santykius. Taigi 2-ojoje užduotyje „SemEval-2018“ siūloma įdomi ir sunki užduotis, t. y. prognozuoti, kokius emodžius sukelia tekstu pagrįsti tweetai. Siūlome šiam uždaviniui nustatyti likutinį CNN-LSTM model į. Mūsų modelis sujungia CNN ir LSTM sluoksnius, kad būtų galima surinkti vietinę ir ilgalaikę kontekstinę informaciją, skirtą vaizduoti tweet ą. In addition, attention mechanism is used to select important components.  Be to, CNN sluoksniuose naudojamas likutinis ryšys, siekiant palengvinti nervų tinklų mokymą. We also incorporated additional features such as POS tags and sentiment features extracted from lexicons.  Mūsų modelis pirmojo paklausimo metu pasiekė 30,25 % makroekonominio vidurkio F balas (t. y. emoji prognozė anglų kalba), 7-ąjį i š 48 dalyvių.', 'mk': 'Емоџис се широко употребени од социјалните медиуми и корисниците на социјалните мрежи кога ги објавуваат своите пораки. Важно е да се проучат односите помеѓу пораките и емоџиите. Thus, in SemEval-2018 Task 2 an interesting and challenging task is proposed, i.e., predicting which emojis are evoked by text-based tweets.  Предложуваме остаток на CNN-LSTM со внимание (RCLA) модел за оваа задача. Нашиот модел ги комбинира слоевите на CNN и LSTM за да ги фати локалните и долготрајните контекстни информации за претставување на Твитер. Покрај тоа, механизмот на внимание се користи за избор на важни компоненти. Покрај тоа, остатокот на поврзаноста се применува на слоевите на ЦНН за да се олесни обуката на невровните мрежи. Ние, исто така, вклучивме дополнителни карактеристики како што се POS ознаки и чувствителни карактеристики извадени од лексиконите. Нашиот модел постигна 30,25 отсто макро-просечен F-резултат во првата подпрашање (т.е., предвидување на емоџи на англиски), рангирајќи се на 7-ми од 48 учесници.', 'ms': 'Emojis digunakan secara luas oleh media sosial dan pengguna rangkaian sosial bila memposting mesej mereka. Ia penting untuk mempelajari hubungan antara mesej dan emoji. Jadi, dalam SemEval-2018 Tugas 2, tugas yang menarik dan mencabar diusulkan, iaitu meramalkan mana emoji yang diseru oleh tweet berdasarkan teks. Kami cadangkan model CNN-LSTM yang tersisa dengan perhatian (RCLA) untuk tugas ini. Model kami menggabungkan lapisan CNN dan LSTM untuk menangkap maklumat kontekstual setempat dan jangkauan panjang untuk mewakili tweet. Selain itu, mekanisme perhatian digunakan untuk memilih komponen penting. Selain itu, sambungan sisa dilaksanakan pada lapisan CNN untuk memudahkan latihan rangkaian saraf. Kami juga memasukkan ciri-ciri tambahan seperti tag POS dan ciri-ciri sentimen yang dikeluarkan dari leksikon. Our model achieved 30.25% macro-averaged F-score in the first subtask (i.e., emoji prediction in English), ranking 7th out of 48 participants.', 'mt': 'Emojis jintużaw b’mod wiesa’ mill-midja soċjali u l-utenti tan-netwerks soċjali meta jippubblikaw il-messaġġi tagħhom. Huwa importanti li jiġu studjati r-relazzjonijiet bejn il-messaġġi u l-emoji. Għalhekk, f’SemEval-2018 Task 2 huwa propost kompitu interessanti u ta’ sfida, jiġifieri, it-tbassir ta’ liema emoji huma evokati minn tweets ibbażati fuq it-test. Aħna nipproponu mudell residwu CNN-LSTM b’attenzjoni (RCLA) għal dan il-kompitu. Our model combines CNN and LSTM layers to capture both local and long-range contextual information for tweet representation.  Barra minn hekk, jintuża mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni biex jintgħażlu komponenti importanti. Barra minn hekk, il-konnessjoni residwa hija applikata għal saffi CNN biex tiffaċilita t-taħriġ tan-netwerks newrali. Inkorporajna wkoll karatteristiċi addizzjonali bħal tikketti POS u karatteristiċi ta’ sentiment estratti mill-lexicons. Il-mudell tagħna kiseb 30.25% punteġġ F makro-medju fl-ewwel sottodomanda (jiġifieri, tbassir emoji bl-Ingliż), li kklassifika s-seba’ minn 48 parteċipant.', 'ml': 'അവയുടെ സന്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200d അയച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d എമോജിസ് സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയിലും സാമൂഹിക വെര്\u200dവറ്റ സന്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഇമോജിക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട്, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 2 ല്\u200d ഒരു രസകരവും വിലാസകരവുമായ ജോലിയാണ് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നത്. അതായത് എമോജിക്ക് ഏത് ടെക്സ്റ്റ്  ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധയോടെ (RCLA) മോഡല്\u200d ഉള്ള ഒരു ബാക്കിയുള്ള CNN-LSTM പ്രൊദാനം ചെയ്യുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സിഎന്\u200dഎനിനെയും എംഎസ്റ്റിംഗിനെയും കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ട്വീറ്റിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുള് കൂടാതെ, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഘടകങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മെന്\u200dകെനിസ്റ്റം ഉപ പിന്നെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുയല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d പരിശീലനം ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നതിനായി ബാക്കിയുള്ള ബന്ധം സിഎന്\u200d എന്\u200d  ലെക്സിക്സിക്കോണില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട പോസ് ടാഗും വികാരങ്ങളും പോലുള്ള കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശേഷതകളും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ചേ Our model achieved 30.25% macro-averaged F-score in the first subtask (i.e., emoji prediction in English), ranking 7th out of 48 participants.', 'pl': 'Emoji są szeroko stosowane przez użytkowników mediów społecznościowych i sieci społecznościowych podczas publikowania swoich wiadomości. Ważne jest, aby zbadać relacje między wiadomościami a emoji. Dlatego w SemEval-2018 Task 2 proponuje się ciekawe i wymagające zadanie, tj. przewidywanie, które emoji są wywoływane przez tweety tekstowe. Do tego zadania proponujemy pozostały model CNN-LSTM z uwagą (RCLA). Nasz model łączy warstwy CNN i LSTM, aby przechwytywać zarówno lokalne, jak i długoterminowe informacje kontekstowe w celu reprezentacji tweetów. Ponadto mechanizm uwagi służy do wyboru ważnych komponentów. Poza tym połączenie resztkowe stosuje się do warstw CNN, aby ułatwić szkolenie sieci neuronowych. Dołączyliśmy również dodatkowe funkcje, takie jak tagi POS i funkcje sentymentów ekstraktowane z leksykonów. Nasz model osiągnął 30,25% makro średni wynik F w pierwszym podzadaniu (tj. przewidywanie emoji w języku angielskim), siódmy z 48 uczestników.', 'no': 'Emotikk vert breidd brukt av sosiale medier og sosiale nettverksbrukarar når meldingane sendar. Det er viktig å studera forbindelsane mellom meldingar og emojis. I semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2 foreslår det eit interessant og vanskeleg oppgåve, dvs. å foreslå kva emojis vert utvikla av tekstbaserte tweeter. Vi foreslår ein residual CNN-LSTM med oppmerksmodell for denne oppgåva. Modellen vårt kombinerer CNN og LSTM-lag for å henta både lokale og lang område kontekstinformasjon for tweet-representasjon. I tillegg vert oppmerksmekanismen brukt for å velja viktige komponentar. I tillegg er det tilgjengelege tilkoplinga til CNN-lag for å gjera opplæring av neuralnettverk. Vi inkluderte også ekstra funksjonar som POS- taggar og sentimentfunksjonar som er ekstrahert frå leksikonsar. Modellen vårt oppnådd 30,25% makro- gjennomsnittsforskrift i den første underspørjinga (t.d. emoji- forhåndsvising i engelsk), som rangerer 7. av 48 deltakarar.', 'ro': 'Emojis-urile sunt utilizate pe scară largă de utilizatorii rețelelor sociale și social media atunci când postează mesajele lor. Este important să studiezi relațiile dintre mesaje și emoji-uri. Astfel, în SemEval-2018 Task 2 este propusă o sarcină interesantă și provocatoare, și anume, predicând ce emojis sunt evocate de tweet-uri pe bază de text. Pentru această sarcină propunem un model rezidual CNN-LSTM cu atenție (RCLA). Modelul nostru combină straturile CNN și LSTM pentru a capta atât informații contextuale locale, cât și pe rază lungă pentru reprezentarea tweet-urilor. În plus, mecanismul de atenție este utilizat pentru a selecta componente importante. În plus, conexiunea reziduală este aplicată straturilor CNN pentru a facilita instruirea rețelelor neuronale. De asemenea, am încorporat caracteristici suplimentare, cum ar fi etichetele POS și caracteristicile sentiment extrase din lexicoane. Modelul nostru a obținut un scor F macro-mediu de 30,25% în prima subactivitate (adică predicția emoji în limba engleză), clasându-se pe locul 7 din 48 de participanți.', 'mn': 'Эмози нь нийгмийн хэвлэл болон нийгмийн сүлжээний хэрэглэгчид хаягдлыг нийтлэх үед ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг. Шинэ мэдээллийн хоорондох харилцаа судлах нь чухал. Тэгэхээр SemEval-2018 Task 2-д нэг сонирхолтой, хэцүү даалгавар санал болгож байна, т.е. текст суурилсан tweets дээр ямар эмужийг хөдөлгөж байгааг таамаглаж байна. Бид энэ ажлын анхаарал (RCLA) загвартай үлдсэн CNN-LSTM-г санал дэвшүүлнэ. Бидний загвар нь CNN болон LSTM давхаруудыг хоёр орон нутгийн болон урт хугацааны туршилтын мэдээллийг холбоотой. Үүнээс гадна анхаарлын механизм чухал хэмжээсүүдийг сонгохын тулд хэрэглэгддэг. Үлдсэн холбоонуудыг CNN-н давхарт ашиглаж мэдрэлийн сүлжээний сургалтын тулд ашигладаг. Мөн бид Лексиконос гарсан POS тегтэй болон мэдрэмжүүдийг нэмэгдүүлсэн нэмэлт өөрчлөлт үүсгэсэн. Бидний загвар макро дундаж 30.25% нь анхны суудалд F-score гарч ирсэн (яг л эмоджи хэлний таамаглалт), 48 оролцогчдын 7-нд орж ирсэн.', 'sr': 'Emozi se široko koriste korisnici društvenih medija i društvenih mreža kada pošalju poruke. Važno je proučavati odnose između poruka i emoja. Dakle, u zadatku 2. iz semiEvala-2018 predlaže se zanimljiv i izazovni zadatak, tj. predviđajući koji emoji izazivaju tekstualni tweets. Predlažemo ostatak CNN-LSTM sa pažnjom (RCLA) model ovog zadatka. Naš model kombinira CNN i LSTM slojeve kako bi uhvatila lokalne i dugoročne kontekstske informacije za predstavljanje tweeta. Osim toga, mehanizam pažnje se koristi za izabrati važne komponente. Osim toga, ostatka veza se primjenjuje na CNN slojeve kako bi olakšala obuku neuralnih mreža. Uključili smo i dodatne karakteristike poput oznake POS-a i karakteristike sentimenta izvučene iz leksiona. Naš model je postigao 30,25% makro-srednji F-rezultat u prvom podpitanju (tj. emoji predviđanje na engleskom jeziku), u redovima 7 od 48 učesnika.', 'so': 'Emojis wuxuu si badan u isticmaalaa isticmaalayaasha shabakadda bulshada iyo shabakadda bulshada marka ay soo diraan warqadooda. Waa muhiim in aad barato xiriirka farsamada iyo emojiska dhexdooda. Sidaa darteed Shaqadda 2 e e SemEval-2018 waxaa la soo jeedaa shuqul xiiso leh oo la qasbi karo, taas oo ah horumarinta emojiska oo ku qoran twiti-qoran. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa sameynta ku nool CNN-LSTM (RCLA) ee shaqadan. Tusaale ahaan ayaa CNN iyo LSTM ku soo wada ururiyey si ay u qabsadaan macluumaad joogto ah oo ku qoran wadashada tweetka. In addition, attention mechanism is used to select important components.  Sidoo kale xiriirka deganaanshaha waxaa lagu codsadaa xarumaha CNN si uu u fududeeyo waxbarashada shabakada neurada. Waxaynu sidoo kale ku qornay tayooyin dheeraad ah, tusaale ahaan baatagyada POS iyo fikrada leksis ka soo baxay. Tusaalkayagii wuxuu gaadhay 30.25% macro-average F-score, taas oo ka mid ah 48 qayb-qeybqaadayaashii koowaad (tusaale ahaan wax ku sii sheegay ingiriisiga emoji).', 'sv': 'Emojis används ofta av sociala medier och sociala nätverksanvändare när de publicerar sina meddelanden. Det är viktigt att studera relationerna mellan meddelanden och emojis. Således föreslås i SemEval-2018 Task 2 en intressant och utmanande uppgift, det vill säga att förutsäga vilka emojis som framkallas av textbaserade tweets. Vi föreslår en rest CNN-LSTM med uppmärksamhetsmodell (RCLA) för denna uppgift. Vår modell kombinerar CNN- och LSTM-lager för att fånga både lokal och långsiktig kontextuell information för tweetpresentation. Dessutom används uppmärksamhetsmekanism för att välja viktiga komponenter. Dessutom tillämpas kvarvarande anslutning på CNN-lager för att underlätta träning av neurala nätverk. Vi införlivade också ytterligare funktioner som POS-taggar och sentimentfunktioner extraherade från lexikon. Vår modell uppnådde 30,25% makro-genomsnittlig F-poäng i den första deluppgiften (dvs emoji prediktion på engelska), rankad 7:e av 48 deltagare.', 'si': 'සමාජික මිඩියාව සහ සාමාජික ජාලය ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ පණිවිඩය පොස්ටල් කරපු වෙලාව පණිවිඩය සහ එමෝජිස් අතර සම්බන්ධය අධ්\u200dයානය කරන්න වැදගත්. ඉතින්, සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩේ 2 විදියට සුදුසුම් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙනවා, ඉතින්, පාළුවන් අධාරිත ට්විට්  අපි මේ වැඩේ අවධානය (RCLA) නිර්මාණයක් තියෙන ඉතිරි CNN-LSTM එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අපේ මොඩේල් CNN සහ LSTM ස්ථානික සහ ලොකු සාමාන්\u200dය තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. ඒවගේම, වැදගත් අංකය තෝරාගන්න අවධානය පද්ධතිය භාවිත වෙනවා. ඒ වගේම, ඉතිරික්ත සම්බන්ධය CNN ලැයිස්තුවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහාය කරන්න. අපි තවමත් පොස් ටැග්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය වලින් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂය ලෙක්සිකන්ස්  අපේ මොඩල් 30.25% මැක්රෝ අනුමාණයෙන් F-ස්කෝර් එක පළමු අනුමාණයෙන් (ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ එමෝජි අනුමාණය), 7වෙනි අංග්\u200dරීසියෝ', 'ur': 'ایموزی ان کے پیغام پوسٹ کرنے کے وقت سوسیل میڈیا اور سوسیل نیٹ ورک کارساز کے ذریعہ وسیع طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. پیغام اور ایموجیس کے درمیان رابطہ کا تحقیق کرنا ضروری ہے اسی طرح، SemEval-2018 Task 2 میں ایک دلچسپ اور مشکل کام پیش کیا جاتا ہے، یعنی پیش آنے والی ہے کہ کس احساسات کو متن بنیاد ٹویٹ کے ذریعے پیش کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم نے اس کام کے لئے ایک چھوڑے سی ان یس ٹی ٹی م کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے۔ ہمارا موڈل ٹویٹ نمایشن کے لئے سین ان اور LSTM لہروں کو ترکیب کرتا ہے تاکہ دونوں موقعیت اور طویل مدینہ کی کنٹکسٹیول معلومات کو پکڑیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، توجه کی مکانیسم ضروری رقم کو انتخاب کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. اس کے علاوہ، بقیہ اتصال سین لیاٹوں پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کہ نئورل نیٹورک کی تعلیم آسان کریں. ہم نے بھی اضافہ ویژہ شامل کیے جیسے POS ٹاگ اور احساسات ویژہ لکسینز سے نکالے گئے۔ ہمارا مدل 30.25% مکرومتوسط F-اسکور پہلی سٹپوسٹ میں پہنچ گیا تھا (یعنی emoji prediction in English) اور 48 مشرکین میں سے 7th ranking میں۔', 'ta': 'எமோஜிஸ் அவர்களுடைய செய்திகளை அனுப்பும் போது பொது சமூக ஊடக மற்றும் சமூக வலைப்பின்னல் பயனர்களால் விரிவ செய்திகளுக்கும் உணர்வுக்குமிடையே தொடர்புகளை படிக்க முக்கியமானது. எனவே, செம்Eval-2018 பணியில் ஒரு சுவாரசியமான மற்றும் சவாலிக்கும் பணியை பரிந்துரைக்கப்படுகிறது, அதாவது, எந்த உணர்வு உரை அடிப்படையில் இருந்து  நாம் இந்த பணிக்கான மாதிரியை கவனத்துடன் ஒரு மீதி CNN-LSTM முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். எங்கள் மாதிரி CNN மற்றும் LSTM அடுக்குகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறது உள்ளூர் மற்றும் நீண்ட நீண்ட விவரம் இருந்து தொடர்ந்த தகவல மேலும், கவனம் முறைமையை முக்கியமான பொருள்களை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. மேலும், மீதம் இணைப்பு CNN அடுக்குகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயிற்சியை பயன்படுத நாம் மேலும் கூடுதல் குணங்களை போஸ் ஒட்டுகள் மற்றும் உணர்வு குணங்களை லெக்சிக்ஸிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றியுள் எங்கள் மாதிரி முதல் துணை பணியில் 30.25% மேக்ரோ சராசரி F- மதிப்பெண்ணை அடைந்தது (அதாவது, ஆங்கிலத்தில் emoji புரியும்) 48 பங்குக்குரியவர்களில் 7 வத', 'uz': "Name Xabarlar va emojis orasidagi munosabatlarni o'rganish muhim. Shunday qilib, SemEval-2018 Vazifani 2 yilda qiziqarli va qiziqarli vazifa talab qiladi, balki ma'lum xabar asosida emojis qanday o'zgartiriladi. Biz shu vazifa uchun qisqa CNN-LSTM modelini taqdimiz. Bizning modelimiz CNN va LSTM qatlamlarini birlashtirish uchun lokal va uzun soʻzda xabarlarni xabar qilish uchun. Koʻproq, muhim komponentlarni tanlash uchun foydalanadi. Davom etishni istaysizmi, tarmoq tarmoqlarini ishlatishga foydalanish uchun daqiqa aloqa CNN qatlamga qoʻllaniladi. Biz leksizdan tashkilgan POS taglari va hissiyotning xususiyatlarini qo'shib turdik. Bizning modelimiz birinchi tub vazifasida 30.25% makro o'rtacha F-scorga erishildi (m. g. eng ingliz tilida emoji hisoblanishi), 48 participlardan 7- chi darajaga ega bo'lgan.", 'vi': 'Cảm xúc được truyền thông xã hội và người dùng mạng xã hội phổ biến khi gửi thông điệp của họ. Quan trọng là nghiên cứu các mối quan hệ giữa các thông điệp và biểu tượng. Do đó, trong Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8, đề xuất một nhiệm vụ thú vị và đầy thử thách, như là dự đoán những biểu tượng kích thích được gợi lên bởi những tweet dựa vào văn bản. Chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình còn lại của CNN-HTTM với sự chú ý (RCLA) cho nhiệm vụ này. Trong mô hình của chúng tôi có nhiều lớp của CNN và HTTM để ghi lại các thông tin ngữ cảnh ở địa phương và phạm vi rộng. Thêm vào đó, cỗ máy chú ý được dùng để chọn các thành phần quan trọng. Bên cạnh đó, kết nối còn lại được áp dụng vào các lớp CNN để giúp huấn luyện các mạng thần kinh. Chúng tôi cũng đã nhập thêm các tính năng khác như thẻ Vị trí và tính chất cảm được chiết xuất từ ngôn ngữ. Mô hình của chúng tôi đã đạt được 30.25. macro trung số F-score ở phần đầu tiên phụ đề (v.e., đa thức dự đoán trong tiếng Anh), thứ thứ bảy ở ngoài tám phần tám.', 'bg': 'Емотиите се използват широко от социалните медии и потребителите на социалните мрежи, когато публикуват съобщенията си. Важно е да се изучават взаимоотношенията между съобщения и емоджи. По този начин в задача 2 се предлага интересна и предизвикателна задача, т.е. да се предскаже кои емоджи са предизвикани от текстово базирани туитове. Предлагаме остатъчен модел за тази задача. Нашият модел комбинира слоеве за улавяне на локална и дългосрочна контекстуална информация за представяне на туитове. В допълнение, механизмът за внимание се използва за избор на важни компоненти. Освен това, остатъчна връзка се прилага към слоевете за улесняване на обучението на невронните мрежи. Включихме и допълнителни функции като тагове и сентиментални функции, извлечени от лексиконите. Нашият модел постигна 30,25% макросреднен резултат в първата подзадача (т.е. прогнозиране на емоджи на английски), класирайки се на 7-о място от 48 участници.', 'nl': "Emoji's worden veel gebruikt door gebruikers van sociale media en sociale netwerken bij het plaatsen van hun berichten. Het is belangrijk om de relaties tussen berichten en emoji's te bestuderen. Zo wordt in SemEval-2018 Task 2 een interessante en uitdagende taak voorgesteld, namelijk voorspellen welke emoji's worden opgeroepen door tekstgebaseerde tweets. Voor deze taak stellen we een residueel CNN-LSTM met aandacht (RCLA) model voor. Ons model combineert CNN- en LSTM-lagen om zowel lokale als lange afstand contextuele informatie vast te leggen voor tweet-representatie. Daarnaast wordt het aandachtsmechanisme gebruikt om belangrijke componenten te selecteren. Bovendien wordt restverbinding toegepast op CNN lagen om de training van neurale netwerken te vergemakkelijken. We hebben ook extra functies opgenomen, zoals POS-tags en sentiment-functies uit lexicons. Ons model behaalde 30,25% macro-gemiddelde F-score in de eerste subtaak (d.w.z., emoji voorspelling in het Engels), 7e van 48 deelnemers.", 'de': 'Emojis werden von Nutzern sozialer Medien und sozialer Netzwerke häufig verwendet, wenn sie ihre Nachrichten posten. Es ist wichtig, die Beziehungen zwischen Nachrichten und Emojis zu studieren. Daher wird in SemEval-2018 Task 2 eine interessante und herausfordernde Aufgabe vorgeschlagen, nämlich vorherzusagen, welche Emojis durch textbasierte Tweets hervorgerufen werden. Für diese Aufgabe schlagen wir ein residuales CNN-LSTM mit Aufmerksamkeitsmodell (RCLA) vor. Unser Modell kombiniert CNN- und LSTM-Schichten, um sowohl lokale als auch weitreichende Kontextinformationen für die Tweet-Darstellung zu erfassen. Darüber hinaus wird ein Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus verwendet, um wichtige Komponenten auszuwählen. Außerdem wird Restverbindung auf CNN-Schichten angewendet, um das Training neuronaler Netzwerke zu erleichtern. Wir haben auch zusätzliche Funktionen wie POS-Tags und Sentiment-Features aus Lexikonen integriert. Unser Modell erzielte 30,25% makro-gemittelten F-Score in der ersten Teilaufgabe (d.h. Emoji-Vorhersage auf Englisch), siebte von 48 Teilnehmern.', 'id': 'Emojis sering digunakan oleh media sosial dan pengguna jaringan sosial ketika memposting pesan mereka. It is important to study the relationships between messages and emojis.  Jadi, di SemEval-2018 Task 2 sebuah tugas menarik dan menantang diusulkan, yaitu memprediksi emoji mana yang disebut oleh tweet berdasarkan teks. Kami mengusulkan model sisa CNN-LSTM dengan perhatian (RCLA) untuk tugas ini. Model kami menggabungkan lapisan CNN dan LSTM untuk menangkap informasi kontekstual lokal dan jangkauan panjang untuk representation tweet. Selain itu, mekanisme perhatian digunakan untuk memilih komponen penting. Selain itu, koneksi sisa diterapkan pada lapisan CNN untuk memudahkan pelatihan jaringan saraf. Kami juga memasukkan fitur tambahan seperti tags POS dan fitur sentimen yang dikeluarkan dari leksikon. Model kami mencapai 30,25% makro-rata-rata F-skor dalam subtask pertama (i.e., prediksi emoji dalam bahasa Inggris), ranking ke-7 dari 48 peserta.', 'fa': 'احساسات توسط رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی و کاربران شبکه\u200cهای اجتماعی وقتی پیغام\u200cهایشان را فرستادن استفاده می\u200cکنند. مهم است که رابطه بین پیام ها و ایموجیس ها را مطالعه کنیم. بنابراین، در تابع ۲۰۱۸، یک کار جالب و سخت\u200cگیری پیشنهاد می\u200cشود، یعنی پیش\u200cبینی کردن کدام ایموجیس را توسط توئیت\u200cهای متن بر اساس متن تغییر می\u200cدهد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل توجه به CNN-LSTM باقی مانده برای این کار. مدل ما لایه\u200cهای CNN و LSTM را ترکیب می\u200cکند تا اطلاعات محلی و مدت طولانی را برای نمایش توئیت بگیرند. علاوه بر این، مکانیسم توجه برای انتخاب بخش مهم استفاده می\u200cشود. علاوه بر این، ارتباط باقی مانده بر طبقه\u200cهای CNN برای آسانی آموزش شبکه\u200cهای عصبی استفاده می\u200cشود. ما همچنین ویژگی\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای مانند نقاشی POS و ویژگی\u200cهای احساسات که از لکسیون استخراج شده\u200cاند را جمع کردیم. مدل ما ۳۰.۲۵ درصد مکرو متوسط F را در اولین سوپرس (یعنی پیش\u200cبینی emoji در انگلیسی) رسید، در حالی که ۷م از ۴۸ شرکتگر بود.', 'hr': 'Emoji se široko koriste korisnici društvenih medija i društvenih mreža kada objavljuju svoje poruke. Važno je proučavati odnose između poruka i emoja. Stoga se predlaže zanimljiv i izazovni zadatak u zadatku 2. na semiEval-2018, tj. predviđajući koji emoji izazivaju tekstualni tweets. Predlažemo ostatak CNN-LSTM sa pažnjom (RCLA) model ovog zadatka. Naš model kombinira CNN i LSTM slojeve kako bi uhvatila lokalne i dugoročne kontekstne informacije za zastupanje tweeta. Osim toga, mehanizam pažnje se koristi za izabrati važne komponente. Osim toga, ostatka veza se primjenjuje na CNN slojeve kako bi olakšala obuku neuralnih mreža. Uključili smo i dodatne karakteristike poput oznake POS-a i karakteristike osjećaja izvučene iz leksiona. Naš model je postigao 30,25% makro-srednji F-rezultat u prvom podpitanju (tj. emoji predviđanje na engleskom jeziku), u redovima 7. od 48 učesnika.', 'da': 'Emojis bruges i vid udstrækning af sociale medier og sociale netværksbrugere, når de sender deres beskeder. Det er vigtigt at studere forholdet mellem beskeder og emojis. Således foreslås der i SemEval-2018 Task 2 en interessant og udfordrende opgave, dvs. at forudsige, hvilke emojis der fremkaldes af tekstbaserede tweets. Vi foreslår en rest CNN-LSTM med opmærksomhedsmodel (RCLA) til denne opgave. Vores model kombinerer CNN- og LSTM-lag for at indfange både lokale og langtrækkende kontekstuelle oplysninger til tweet-repræsentation. Derudover bruges opmærksomhedsmekanisme til at vælge vigtige komponenter. Desuden anvendes resterende forbindelse til CNN lag for at lette træningen af neurale netværk. Vi indarbejdede også yderligere funktioner såsom POS tags og sentiment funktioner udvundet fra leksikoner. Vores model opnåede 30,25% makro-gennemsnit F-score i den første underopgave (dvs. emoji forudsigelse på engelsk), placeret 7. ud af 48 deltagere.', 'sw': 'Emojis inatumiwa sana na watumiaji wa mitandao ya kijamii na mitandao ya kijamii pale wanapoandika ujumbe wao. Ni muhimu kusoma uhusiano kati ya ujumbe na hisia. Hivyo, katika kazi ya SemEval-2018, kazi yenye kuvutia na changamoto inapendekezwa, yaani kutabiri hisia gani zinaendelea na twiti za maandishi. Tunaendelea CNN-LSTM akiwa na mifano ya kutangaza (RCLA) kwa kazi hii. Mfano wetu unaunganisha vipande vya CNN na LSTM ili kuwakamata taarifa za muda mrefu kwa uwakilishi wa twita. In addition, attention mechanism is used to select important components.  Zaidi ya hayo, uhusiano unaotumiwa kwenye vipande vya CNN ili kuwezesha mafunzo ya mitandao ya neura. Pia tulijumuisha vipengele vingine kama vile alama za POS na hisia zilizotolewa kutoka lexico. Mfano wetu ulipata kiwango cha F cha wastani cha asilimia 30.25 katika jukwaa la kwanza (yaani utabiri wa emoji kwa Kiingereza), kilikuwa na kiwango cha 7 kati ya washiriki 48.', 'ko': '소셜미디어와 소셜네트워크 사용자들은 메시지를 발표할 때 이모티콘을 광범위하게 사용한다.정보와 이모티콘 간의 관계를 연구하는 것은 매우 중요하다.따라서 SemEval-18 미션2에서 재미있고 도전적인 미션을 제시했다. 즉, 어떤 표정이 텍스트를 바탕으로 하는 트윗으로 유발되는지 예측하는 것이다.우리는 잔차 CNN-LSTM 주의(RCLA) 모델을 제시했다.우리의 모델은 CNN과 LSTM 층을 결합해 로컬과 원격 상하문 정보를 포획하여 트위터 표시에 사용한다.이 밖에 주의 메커니즘은 중요한 성분을 선택하는 데 쓰인다.또 신경 네트워크 훈련에 편리하도록 잔차 연결을 CNN층에 적용했다.우리는 또 다른 기능, 예를 들어 어성 라벨과 어휘에서 추출한 감정 특징을 추가했다.우리의 모델은 첫 번째 하위 임무(즉 영어 표정 예측)에서 30.25%의 거시적 평균 F 점수를 받아 48명의 참여자 중 7위에 올랐다.', 'am': 'ኢዮጂ መልዕክታቸውን በመጠቀም ጊዜ በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ እና ማኅበራዊ መረብ ተጠቃሚዎች በጥብቅ ተጠቃሚዎች ይጠቀቃሉ፡፡ መልዕክቶች እና ኢሜጂ መካከል ግንኙነትን ለመማር ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ስለዚህም በሴmEval-2018 ስራ 2 የሚጠያየቅና እና የሚያቃልል ስራ ተዘጋጅቷል፤ የኢሜጂ ኢሜጂ በምን በጽሑፍ የተደረገ ትዊተሮች የተዘጋጀ መሆኑን ለማስታወቂያ ነው፡፡ We propose a residual CNN-LSTM with attention (RCLA) model for this task.  ሞዴሌያችን CNN እና LSTM ደረጃዎችን ለሀገር እና ረጅም የሀገር መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም እና ለመጠየቅ ትዊተር አካባቢ ለመያሰብ ያቆማል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ማስታወቂያው ማሰናከል የተጠቃሚ እኮንዶች ለመምረጥ ይጠቀማል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የቀረውን ግንኙነት በCNN ደረጃዎች ላይ ለመጠቀም የነዌብ መረብ ማጠቃለያውን ለማግኘት ይጠቅማል፡፡ የፖስስ መክፈቻዎች እና የልኮክስ ስህተት ማውጣት እንደተጨማሪዎች አቀራጠርን አቀረብን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን ከመጀመሪያው ደብዳቤ (እንግሊዝኛ ኢሜጂን ትንቢት) 30.25 በመቶ ማክሮው የF-score አግኝቷል፡፡ ከ48 ተጋሪዎቹ 7.', 'tr': 'Emojiler sosial mediýalar we sosial şebek ulananlaryň hatlaryny gönderýän wagtlary köpräk ulanylýar. Mesajlar we emojis arasyndaky ilişkileri öwrenmek mümkinçidir. Şol sebäpli, SemEval-2018 Görevi 2-de gyzykly we çykyş taýýarlama teklip edildi, meýdançası, haýsy emojis metin tabanly tweets tarapyndan täzeden edilýändigini tahmin edip biler. Biz CNN-LSTM üçin bu täzim üçin gaýd edilen nusga saýlaýrys. Biziň modelimiz CNN we LSTM gatlaklary tweet temsili üçin ýerleşýän we uzak hatlaryň içine gatnaşmak üçin birleşýär Ayrıca, üns meýdançasyny wajyp aýratyn saýlamak üçin ullanýar. Munuň ýagdaýynda, CNN gatlaklary näyral şebekeleriň eğitimi aňsat etmek üçin gaýd edildi. Biz hem POS tägleri we duýgulary ýaly hatlaryň hatlaryndan çykarylýan özellikleri bilen birleşdirdik. Biziň nusgymyz ilkinji altsoragda 30.25% makro ortalama çykyşymyz bardy, 48-nji çykyşçylardan 7-nji sapar çykdy.', 'af': "Emojies word vaste gebruik deur sosiale media en sosiale netwerk gebruikers wanneer hulle boodskappe stuur. Dit is belangrik om die verhouding tussen boodskappe en emojies te ondersoek. So, in SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2 is 'n interessante en pragtige taak voorgestel, i.e. voorskou wat emojis deur teksbaseerde tweets uitgevoer word. Ons voorstel 'n oorblyfstandige CNN-LSTM met aandag (RCLA) model vir hierdie taak. Ons model kombinieer CNN en LSTM laagte om beide plaaslike en lang omvang konteksual inligting vir tweet voorstelling te vang. In addition, attention mechanism is used to select important components. Buiten, die oorblyfstelike verbinding word toegewend na CNN-laag om die onderwerking van neurale netwerke te maak. Ons het ook addisionele funksies ingesluit soos POS etikette en sentimente funksies uitgevoer van leksikone. Ons model het 30,25% makro-gemiddelde F-score bereik in die eerste subvraag (i.e. emoji voorskou in Engels), ranking van 7de uit 48 deelnaders.", 'hy': "Էմոյզիսը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների և սոցիալական ցանցի օգտագործողների կողմից լայնորեն օգտագործվում են իրենց հաղորդագրությունները տեղադրելու ժամանակ: Կարևոր է ուսումնասիրել հաղորդագրությունների և էմոջայի միջև եղած հարաբերությունները: Այսպիսով, 2018-ի ՍեմԷվալ 2-ին առաջարկում է հետաքրքիր և դժվար խնդիր, այսինքն' կանխատեսելով, թե ինչ էմոջաներ են առաջացնում տեքստի վրա հիմնված թվիթերի միջոցով: Մենք առաջարկում ենք CNN-LSMT-ի մնացած ուշադրության մոդել այս խնդրի համար: Our model combines CNN and LSTM layers to capture both local and long-range contextual information for tweet representation.  Ավելին, ուշադրության մեխանիզմը օգտագործվում է կարևոր բաղադրիչներ ընտրելու համար: Besides, residual connection is applied to CNN layers to facilitate the training of neural networks.  Մենք նաև ներառեցինք նաև ավելին հատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են POS-ի նշանները և զգացմունքների հատկությունները, որոնք հանվել են լեքսիկոններից: Մեր մոդելը հասավ 30.25 տոկոսի մակրոմիջին F-գնահատականի առաջին ենթահարցում (այսինքն, էմոջի կանխատեսումը անգլերենում), որն 48 մասնակիցներից 7-րդ գնահատականն էր:", 'sq': 'Emojis përdoren gjerësisht nga mediat shoqërore dhe përdoruesit e rrjetit shoqëror kur publikojnë mesazhet e tyre. Është e rëndësishme të studiojmë marrëdhëniet midis mesazheve dhe emoxheve. Kështu, në SemEval-2018 Task 2 propozohet një detyrë interesante dhe sfiduese, që do të thotë parashikimi i cilit emoji evokohen nga tweetet me bazë teksti. Ne propozojmë një model të mbetur CNN-LSTM me vëmendje (RCLA) për këtë detyrë. Our model combines CNN and LSTM layers to capture both local and long-range contextual information for tweet representation.  Përveç kësaj, mekanizmi i vëmendjes përdoret për të zgjedhur komponente të rëndësishme. Përveç kësaj, lidhjet e mbetura aplikohen në nivelet CNN për të lehtësuar trainimin e rrjeteve nervore. We also incorporated additional features such as POS tags and sentiment features extracted from lexicons.  Modeli ynë arriti 30.25% makro-mesatare pikë F në nënpyetjen e parë (pra, parashikimi emoji në anglisht), duke renditur të shtatën nga 48 pjesëmarrës.', 'az': 'Emojil…ôr sosyal media v…ô sosyal Ňü…ôb…ôk…ô istifad…ô√ßil…ôrinin ismarńĪŇülarńĪnńĪ g√∂nd…ôrm…ôkd…ô geniŇül…ôndirilir. ńįsmarńĪŇülar v…ô emoji arasńĪndakńĪ iliŇükileri t…ôhsil etm…ôk m√∂vcuddur. Bel…ôlikl…ô, SemEval-2018 Task 2-d…ô m…ôtn-tabanlńĪ tweetl…ôrd…ôn kimin emojis t…ôŇükil edildiyini t…ômin edir. Biz bu iŇüin m…ôlumatńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn geri qalan CNN-LSTM modelini t…ôblińü edirik. Bizim modell…ôrimiz CNN v…ô LSTM s…ôviyy…ôl…ôrini h…ôr ikisini yerli v…ô uzun s…ôviyy…ôd…ô m√ľxt…ôlif m…ôlumatlarńĪ tweet g√∂st…ôricisi √ľ√ß√ľn birl…ôŇüdirir. ∆Źvv…ôlc…ô, m…ôlumat komponentl…ôri se√ßm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn g√∂zl…ôm…ô mehanizmisi istifad…ô edilir. Bundan baŇüqa, niyral ańülarńĪn t…ôhsil edilm…ôsini asanlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn CNN katlarńĪna istifad…ô edilir. Biz d…ô Leksikonlardan √ßńĪxarńĪlan POS etiketl…ôri v…ô duygularńĪ √∂zellikl…ôri kimi …ôlav…ô √∂zellikl…ôri birl…ôŇüdirdik. Bizim modell…ôrimiz ilk subtask i √ßind…ô 30,25% makro-ortalama F-score q…ôbul etdi.', 'ca': "Emojis are widely used by social media and social network users when posting their messages.  És important estudiar les relacions entre missatges i emoji. Així, a SemEval-2018 la tasca 2 es propone una tasca interessant i desafiadora, és a dir, predir quins emoji evoquen els tweets basats en text. Proposem un model residual de CNN-LSTM amb atenció (RCLA) per a aquesta tasca. El nostre model combina capes CNN i LSTM per capturar informació contextual a llarg i local per a representar tweets. A més, s'utilitza un mecanisme d'atenció per seleccionar components importants. A més, es aplica una connexió residual a capes CNN per facilitar l'entrenament de xarxes neurals. També vam incorporar característiques adicionals com les etiquetes POS i les característiques de sentiment extraïdes dels lexicòns. El nostre model va aconseguir una puntuació F de 30,25% macromitjana en la primera subterrània (i.e., predicció emoji en anglès), classificant-se en 7 de cada 48 participants.", 'bs': 'Emoji se široko koriste korisnici društvenih medija i društvenih mreža kada objavljuju svoje poruke. Važno je proučiti odnose između poruka i emoja. Stoga se predlaže zanimljiv i izazovni zadatak u zadatku 2 od semiEval-2018, tj. predviđajući koji emoji izazivaju tekstualni tweets. Predlažemo ostatak CNN-LSTM sa pažnjom (RCLA) model ovog zadatka. Naš model kombinira CNN i LSTM slojeve kako bi uhvatila lokalne i dugoročne kontekstske informacije za zastupanje tweeta. Osim toga, mehanizam pažnje se koristi za izabrati važne komponente. Osim toga, ostatka veza se primjenjuje na CNN slojeve kako bi olakšala obuku neuralnih mreža. Uključili smo i dodatne karakteristike poput oznake POS-a i karakteristike osjećaja izvučene iz leksiona. Naš model je postigao 30,25% makro-srednji F-rezultat u prvom podpitanju (tj. emoji predviđanje na engleskom jeziku), u redovima 7. od 48 učesnika.', 'et': 'Emojisid kasutavad laialdaselt sotsiaalmeedia ja sotsiaalvõrgustike kasutajad oma sõnumite postitamisel. Oluline on uurida sõnumite ja emojide vahelisi seoseid. Seega pakutakse SemEval-2018 ülesandes 2 välja huvitav ja keeruline ülesanne, st ennustada, milliseid emojisid tekitavad tekstipõhised säutsud. Selle ülesande jaoks pakume välja CNN-LSTM tähelepanuga (RCLA) jääkmudeli. Meie mudel ühendab CNN ja LSTM kihid, et jäädvustada nii kohalikku kui ka pikaajalist kontekstiteavet säutsu esitamiseks. Lisaks kasutatakse tähelepanu mehhanismi oluliste komponentide valimiseks. Peale selle rakendatakse CNN kihtidele jääkühendust, et hõlbustada närvivõrkude koolitamist. Lisasime ka täiendavaid funktsioone, nagu POS sildid ja sentimentaalsed funktsioonid, mis on ekstraheeritud leksikonidest. Meie mudel saavutas esimeses alamülesandes 30,25% makrokeskmise F-skoori (st emoji prognoos inglise keeles), mis oli 48 osalejast seitsmes.', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisen median ja sosiaalisen verkoston käyttäjät käyttävät emojeja laajalti viestiensä lähettämisessä. On tärkeää tutkia viestien ja emojien välisiä suhteita. Näin ollen SemEval-2018 Task 2:ssa ehdotetaan mielenkiintoista ja haastavaa tehtävää eli ennustaa, mitä emojija tekstipohjaiset tweetit herättävät. Tähän tehtävään ehdotamme jäännösCNN-LSTM with attention (RCLA) -mallia. Mallimme yhdistää CNN- ja LSTM-tasot tallentamaan sekä paikalliset että pitkän kantaman kontekstitiedot tweetin esittämistä varten. Lisäksi huomiomekanismia käytetään tärkeimpien komponenttien valitsemiseen. Lisäksi jäännösliitäntää käytetään CNN-kerroksiin helpottamaan hermoverkkojen koulutusta. Lisäsimme myös muita ominaisuuksia, kuten POS-tunnisteita ja sanastoista poimittuja tunteita. Mallimme saavutti 30,25% makrokeskiarvon F-pisteen ensimmäisessä alatehtävässä (eli emoji-ennuste englanniksi) ja sijoittui seitsemänneksi 48 osallistujasta.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম এবং সামাজিক নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহারকারীরা ব্যাপক ব্যবহার করেছে যখন তাদের বার্তা পোস্ট বার্তা এবং ইমেজিকের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক পড়ার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। তাই সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজে একটি মজার এবং চ্যালেঞ্জিক কাজ প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, যেমন ভবিষ্যৎ করা হচ্ছে যে টুইট ভিত্তিক টুইটের মাধ্যমে কোন ইম আমরা এই কাজের জন্য মনোযোগ দিয়ে বাকি সিএনএন-এলস্টিমের একটি মডেল প্রস্তাব করি। আমাদের মডেল সিএনএন এবং এলএসএম এলাকাকে একত্রিত করে টুইটের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য স্থানীয় এবং দীর্ঘ দীর্ঘ তথ্য গ্রহণ করার এছাড়াও গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উপাদান নির্বাচনের জন্য মনোযোগ মেকেন্দ্র ব্যবহার করা হয়। এছাড়াও নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য সিএনএন স্তরে বাকী সংযোগ প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। লেক্সিকোর থেকে বের করা পোস ট্যাগ এবং অনুভূতির বৈশিষ্ট্য। আমাদের মডেল প্রথম সাবকাজে ৩০. ২৫% ম্যাক্রো গড়ে ফ-স্কোর অর্জন করেছে (যেমন ইমোজি ভাষায় ভবিষ্যৎবাণী), ৪৮ জন অংশগ্রহণকারীদের মধ্য', 'cs': 'Emoji jsou široce používány uživateli sociálních médií a sociálních sítí při zveřejňování svých zpráv. Je důležité studovat vztahy mezi zprávami a emoji. Proto je v SemEval-2018 Task 2 navržen zajímavý a náročný úkol, tj. předpověď, které emoji jsou evokovány textovými tweety. Pro tento úkol navrhujeme zbytkový model CNN-LSTM s pozorností (RCLA). Náš model kombinuje vrstvy CNN a LSTM pro zachycení lokálních i dlouhodobých kontextových informací pro reprezentaci tweetů. Kromě toho se mechanismus pozornosti používá k výběru důležitých komponent. Kromě toho je zbytkové spojení aplikováno na CNN vrstvy pro usnadnění tréninku neuronových sítí. Začlenili jsme také další funkce, jako jsou POS tagy a funkce sentimentu extrahované z lexikonů. Náš model dosáhl 30,25% makro-průměrného F skóre v prvním podúkolu (tj. predikce emoji v angličtině), sedmého z 48účastníků.', 'jv': 'Jejaring Erekan kanggo ngirim barang kelas karo emus. Nambah, Samsul, Samsul-2008 task 2 dumadhi sing apik lan kelas nggawe gerakan sampeyan siji, ta.d. supoyo supoyo urip kuwi e nemoji sing bisa evoluité karo teks-basa. Awak dhéwé mulai nggawe sistem ditambah-MTR lan ngawe barang nggawe modèl (RLA) kanggo nggawe barang iki. model kita digawe unyong "MTR" lan "LTT M" Layer gak bukane gak bebasan informasi sistem lan gambar contextual kanggo gambar tarjamahan politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness lan tambah, sampeyan mbut dumuga nungsa bandakan MT kanggo ngejarakake tresnaning ing tambah netah. Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh cara-cara sing dibutuhke lagi nggambar SMS lan dibutuhke modelo sing wis rampunga 30.24% macro-mediated F-linear nggambar 1', 'he': "האמוג'יס משתמשים באופן רחב על ידי מדיה חברתית ומשתמשים ברשת חברתית כשפורסמים את ההודעות שלהם. חשוב ללמוד את היחסים בין הודעות לאמוג'ים. ככה, בסמס-Eval-2018 משימה 2 מוצעת משימה מעניינת ומתגידה, כלומר, לחזות איזה אמוג'ים מתעוררים על ידי טוויטים מבוססים בטקסט. אנחנו מציעים מודל CNN-LSTM שארית עם תשומת לב (RCLA) למשימה זו. המודל שלנו משלב שכבות CNN ו LSTM כדי לתפוס גם מידע קונטקסטי מקומי וגם לטווח ארוך עבור מייצג טוויט. בנוסף, מנגנון תשומת לב משמש לבחור רכיבים חשובים. חוץ מזה, הקשר השארי מופעל על שכבות CNN כדי להקל את האימונים של רשתות עצביות. הכנסנו גם תכונות נוספות כמו תוויות POS וכונות רגשות מווצאים מלקסיקונים. המודל שלנו השיג 30.25% נקודת F בממוצע מקרו בשאלה הראשונה (כלומר, חיזוי אמוג'י באנגלית), המדרגות השביעית מתוך 48 משתתפים.", 'ha': "Emojis yana amfani da waɗancan mitandai da mitandaki na jamii idan sun poste message. Kima muhimu a karanta mazaɓa tsakanin message da hisobi. Kamar haka, a cikin aikin SemEl-2018, aka buɗa wani aikin mai fasahawa da mai gauraya, misali, yana da bastarwa da ake buɗe kashi na matsayi. Munã goyyar da wani misali na bakin CNN-LstuM da aikin nan. Our model combines CNN and LSTM layers to capture both local and long-range contextual information for tweet representation.  A ƙara, ana amfani da alama masu kiyãya zuwa za'a zãɓi ƙanshin masu muhimu. Babu, an applies zuwa zane-zanen CNN don ya sauƙaƙara wa tsarin zanen neural. Mun sami da wasu misãlai kamar tagogi na PoS da sauran hisãbi wanda aka fito daga leki. Mijaren mu ya isa matsayin F-score 30.25 cikin firma na farko (misali, abõkan hisãbi na Ingiriya), mai ranar 7 daga 48 mushirikai.", 'sk': 'Emojije pogosto uporabljajo uporabniki družbenih omrežij in družbenih omrežij pri objavi svojih sporočil. Pomembno je preučiti odnose med sporočili in emojiji. Tako je v SemEval-2018 naloga 2 predlagana zanimiva in zahtevna naloga, tj. napovedovanje, katere emojije se sprožijo z besedilnimi tweeti. Za to nalogo predlagamo model ostanka CNN-LSTM s pozornostjo (RCLA). Naš model združuje plasti CNN in LSTM, da zajame lokalne in dolgoročne kontekstualne informacije za predstavitev tweetov. Poleg tega se za izbiro pomembnih komponent uporablja mehanizem pozornosti. Poleg tega se preostala povezava uporablja na plasti CNN, da se olajša usposabljanje nevronskih omrežij. Vključili smo tudi dodatne funkcije, kot so POS oznake in sentimentalne funkcije, pridobljene iz leksikonov. Naš model je dosegel 30,25-odstotno makropovprečno F-rezultat v prvi podnalogi (tj. napoved emojijev v angleščini) in se uvrstil na 7. mesto od 48 udeležencev.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པ་ཡིན་པས་ ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་emojis དབར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་སུ་གཏོང་ནི་གལ་ཆེན་རེད། དེར་བརྟེན། SemEval-2018 ལས་ཀ་གཉིས་ནང་དུ་མཐོང་ཚུལ་དང་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅན་གྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་གང་ཞིག་གིས་ཡིག་གི་བརྟེན་ནས། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་དོན་ལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་བའི་CNN-LSTM་གི་མིང་དཔེ་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་མཐུད་ས CNN དང་LSTM བང་རིམ་ཆ་མཉམ་དུ་རང་ཁུལ་དང་རིང་ཡུལ་གྱི་contextual information for tweet representation ཆ་ཤས་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་བདམས་ནས་གནད་སྤེལ་བའི་ལག་སྟར་བེད་སྤྱོད། དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། རྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐུད་ནི་CNN ཡི་བང་རིམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པ་དེ་ནུས་མཐུད་སྒོ་འབྱེད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་གསལ་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཁ་ཤས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་སེམས་རྟགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བཙུགས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདུག་གྱིས་དང་པོ་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': '# TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'ar': '#TeamINF في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية في التغريدات', 'pt': '#TeamINF no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: previsão de emojis em tweets', 'fr': "#TeamINF à SemeVal-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Prédiction d'Emoji dans les Tweets", 'es': '#TeamINF en SemEval-2018 Tarea 2: Predicción de Emoji en Tweets', 'ja': '# TeamINF at SemEval -2018タスク2 ：ツイートの絵文字予測', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018ÕŖĪ2#TeamINF:µÄ©µ¢ćĶĪ©µāģń¼”ÕÅĘÕŹĀ', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर #TeamINF: Tweets में इमोजी भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': '#TeamINF на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Прогнозирование эмодзи в твитах', 'ga': '#TeamINF ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Tuar Emoji in Tweets', 'hu': '#TeamINF a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Emoji jóslás tweetekben', 'ka': '# TeamINF semiEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'kk': '# TeamINF жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында 2- тапсырма: Твиттерде Emoji тапсырмасы', 'it': '#TeamINF a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Prediczione Emoji nei Tweet', 'ms': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'el': '#TeamINF στο Καθήκον 2: Προβολές σε Τουίτερ', 'mt': "#TeamINF f'SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets", 'lt': '#TeamINF SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'mk': '#TeamINF на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Предвидување на Емоја на Твитови', 'no': '#TeamINF på halvEval-2018 Oppgåve 2: Emoji-forordning i tweets', 'mn': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'pl': '#TeamINF na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Prognoza Emoji w Tweetach', 'sr': '#TeamINF na semiEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji predviđanje u Tweets', 'ml': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'si': '#teamINF at Half-2018 Job 2: Emobi Precdiction in Tweets', 'sv': '#TeamINF på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Emoji Prediction i Tweets', 'ta': '#செம்Eval-2018 செயல் 2: எமோயி முன்னேற்றம்', 'ur': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'ro': '#TeamINF la SemEval-2018 Task 2: Predicția emoji în Tweets', 'so': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Shaqada 2: Diqbalka Emoji ee Tweets', 'uz': 'SemEval-2018 vazifa 2: Emoji Prediction on Twitter', 'vi': 'đề cao 35;Teaminf at SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 2: Emoji prediction in Tweet', 'bg': '#Задача 2: Прогнозиране на емоджи в туитове', 'da': '#TeamINF på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Emoji forudsigelse i tweets', 'nl': '#TeamINF op SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Emoji Voorspelling in Tweets', 'hr': '#TeamINF na semiEval-2018 zadatak 2: Emoji predviđanje u Tweets', 'de': '#TeamINF bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Emoji Vorhersage in Tweets', 'id': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'fa': '#TeamINF at semiEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'sw': '#TeamINF kwenye SemEval-2018 Kazi 2: Utawala wa Emoji katika twita', 'tr': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'af': '#TeamINF by SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Emoji voorskrif in Tweets', 'am': '#TeamINF በሴmEval-2018 ስራ 2: ኢዮጂ ፕሬዚዝርት በTweets', 'ko': '#TeamINF가SemEval-18 미션2: 트윗 속 표정 예측', 'hy': '#ՏիմINF-ը, 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" 2. հանձնարարությունը. Էմոյի կանխատեսումը թվիթերում', 'sq': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'bn': '#সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: টুইটে ইমোজি প্রেশন', 'az': '#TeamINF at semiEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'bs': '#TeamINF na semiEval-2018 zadatak 2: Emoji predviđanje u Tweets', 'fi': '#TeamINF SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Emoji Ennuste Tweetsissä', 'cs': '#TeamINF na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Emoji predikce ve tweetech', 'et': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 2: Emoji prognoos tweets', 'ca': '#TeamINF a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'jv': '#GrumINF nang seminval-2013 task 2: emuji predikion nang Two', 'ha': 'Taimar 2: Emoji Prediction in Twitter', 'sk': '#TeamINF na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: Napoved emojev v tweetih', 'he': '#Team INF at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'bo': '#TeamINF at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe a methodology to predict emoji in tweets. Our approach is based on the classic bag-of-words model in conjunction with word embeddings. The used classification algorithm was Logistic Regression. This architecture was used and evaluated in the context of the SemEval 2018 challenge (task 2, subtask 1).', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف منهجية للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية في التغريدات. يعتمد نهجنا على نموذج حقيبة الكلمات الكلاسيكي جنبًا إلى جنب مع حفلات الزفاف. كانت خوارزمية التصنيف المستخدمة هي الانحدار اللوجستي. تم استخدام هذه البنية وتقييمها في سياق تحدي SemEval 2018 (المهمة 2 ، المهمة الفرعية 1).', 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos una metodología para predecir emojis en los tuits. Nuestro enfoque se basa en el modelo clásico de bolsa de palabras junto con la incrustación de palabras. El algoritmo de clasificación utilizado fue Regresión logística. Esta arquitectura se utilizó y evaluó en el contexto del desafío SemEval 2018 (tarea 2, subtarea 1).', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons une méthodologie permettant de prédire les émoticônes dans les tweets. Notre approche est basée sur le modèle classique du sac de mots associé à l'intégration de mots. L'algorithme de classification utilisé était Régression logistique. Cette architecture a été utilisée et évaluée dans le contexte du challenge SemEval 2018 (tâche 2, sous-tâche 1).", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos uma metodologia para prever emojis em tweets. Nossa abordagem é baseada no modelo clássico de saco de palavras em conjunto com incorporação de palavras. O algoritmo de classificação utilizado foi Regressão Logística. Essa arquitetura foi utilizada e avaliada no contexto do desafio SemEval 2018 (tarefa 2, subtarefa 1).', 'ja': '本稿では、ツイートにおける絵文字を予測する方法論について述べる。当社のアプローチは、単語の埋め込みと組み合わせて、古典的な言葉のバッグモデルに基づいています。使用された分類アルゴリズムはロジスティック回帰であった。このアーキテクチャは、SemEval 2018チャレンジ（タスク2、サブタスク1 ）の文脈で使用され、評価されました。', 'zh': '本文中,述占表情符号法。 其法基于经典词袋模形与词嵌。 用分类算法Logistic归。 此体系结构以 SemEval 2018 挑战( 2、子 1)之背景也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम ट्वीट्स में इमोजी की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक पद्धति का वर्णन करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण शब्द एम्बेडिंग के साथ संयोजन के रूप में क्लासिक बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स मॉडल पर आधारित है। प्रयुक्त वर्गीकरण एल्गोरिथ्म लॉजिस्टिक प्रतिगमन था। इस वास्तुकला का उपयोग किया गया था और SemEval 2018 चुनौती (कार्य 2, subtask 1) के संदर्भ में मूल्यांकन किया गया था।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем методологию прогнозирования эмодзи в твитах. Наш подход основан на классической модели Bag-of-Sords в сочетании с вложениями слов. В качестве алгоритма классификации использовалась логистическая регрессия. Эта архитектура была использована и оценена в контексте задачи SemEval 2018 (задача 2, подзадача 1).', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar mhodheolaíocht chun emoji i tweets a thuar. Tá ár gcur chuige bunaithe ar an tsamhail clasaiceach mála de na focail i gcomhar le leabaithe focal. Ba é an t-algartam aicmithe a úsáideadh ná Aischéimniú Lóistíochta. Baineadh úsáid as an ailtireacht seo agus rinneadh meastóireacht uirthi i gcomhthéacs dhúshlán SemEval 2018 (tasc 2, fothasc 1).', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში ვწერებთ მეტოლოგია, რომელიც ემოჯიას ტვირში წინასწორებლად. ჩვენი პროგორმაცია კლასიკური სიტყვების მოდელზე დაბაზიან, რომელიც სიტყვების დამატებით. გამოყენებული კლასიფიკაციის ალგორიტიმ ლოგისტიკური რეგრესია იყო. ამ არქტიქტიკატის გამოყენება და განსაზღვრება SemEval 2018 წინაწყვეტის კონტექსტში (სამუშაო 2, სამუშაო 1).', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy módszertant írunk le az emoji tweetekben való előrejelzésére. Megközelítésünk a klasszikus szózsák modellre épül, szóbeágyazásokkal együtt. A használt osztályozási algoritmus a Logistic Regression volt. Ezt az architektúrát a SemEval 2018 kihívás keretében használtuk és értékeltük (2. feladat, 1. részfeladat).', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε μια μεθοδολογία για την πρόβλεψη emoji σε tweets. Η προσέγγισή μας βασίζεται στο κλασικό μοντέλο σακούλας λέξεων σε συνδυασμό με ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Ο χρησιμοποιούμενος αλγόριθμος ταξινόμησης ήταν η Logistic Regression. Αυτή η αρχιτεκτονική χρησιμοποιήθηκε και αξιολογήθηκε στο πλαίσιο της πρόκλησης SemEval 2018 (εργασία 2, δευτερεύουσα εργασία 1).', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname metodiką, skirtą prognozuoti emodžius tweetuose. Mūsų požiūris grindžiamas klasikiniu žodžių maišo modeliu kartu su žodžių įterpimu. Naudojamas klasifikavimo algoritmas buvo Logistinė regresija. Ši architektūra buvo naudojama ir vertinama atsižvelgiant į 2018 m. SemEval uždavinį (2 uždavinys, 1 papunktis).', 'mk': 'Во овој весник опишуваме методологија за предвидување на емоџи на твитови. Нашиот пристап е базиран на класичниот модел на вреќа со зборови во заедница со зборови вградени. Користениот алгоритм за класификација беше логистичка регресија. This architecture was used and evaluated in the context of the SemEval 2018 challenge (task 2, subtask 1).', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan metodologi untuk meramalkan emoji dalam tweet. pendekatan kita berdasarkan model beg-perkataan klasik bersama dengan penyembedding perkataan. Algoritma klasifikasi yang digunakan adalah Regresi Logistik. Arkitektur ini digunakan dan diteliti dalam konteks cabaran SemEval 2018 (tugas 2, subtask 1).', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഇമോജിയെ ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദം വാക്കുകളുമായി ക്ലാസിക്ക് ബാഗ് ഓഫ് വാക്കുകളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d അല്\u200dഗോരിതം ലോഗിസ്റ്റിക് റിഗ്രഷന്\u200d ആയിരുന്നു. ഈ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചറിറ്റര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 വ്യാല്\u200dവെല്ലുവിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d വിലയി', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, a ħna niddeskrivu metodoloġija li tipprevedi emoji fit-tweets. L-approċċ tagħna huwa bbażat fuq il-mudell klassiku tal-borża tal-kliem flimkien mal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem. L-algoritmu ta’ klassifikazzjoni użat kien Regressjoni Loġika. Din l-arkitettura ntużat u evalwat fil-kuntest tal-isfida SemEval 2018 (kompitu 2, sottomistoqsija 1).', 'it': "In questo articolo, descriviamo una metodologia per prevedere emoji nei tweet. Il nostro approccio si basa sul classico modello bag-of-words in combinazione con incorporazioni di parole. L'algoritmo di classificazione utilizzato era Logistic Regression. Questa architettura è stata utilizzata e valutata nel contesto della sfida SemEval 2018 (compito 2, sottomissione 1).", 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi ein metodologi for å foregå emoji i tweets. Tilnærminga vårt er basert på den klassiske pakkeordmodellen i samsvar med ordinnbygging. Den brukte klassifikasjonsgoritmen var logistisk regresjon. Denne arkitekturen vart brukt og evaluert i konteksten av semiEval 2018-utfordringen (oppgåva 2, subtspør 1).', 'pl': 'W artykule opisujemy metodologię przewidywania emoji w tweetach. Nasze podejście opiera się na klasycznym modelu torby słów w połączeniu z osadzeniami słów. Zastosowanym algorytmem klasyfikacji była Regresja Logistyczna. Architektura ta została wykorzystana i oceniona w kontekście wyzwania SemEval 2018 (zadanie 2, podzadanie 1).', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem o metodologie pentru a prezice emoji în tweet-uri. Abordarea noastră se bazează pe modelul clasic bag-of-words în combinație cu încorporarea cuvintelor. Algoritmul de clasificare folosit a fost Regresia Logistică. Această arhitectură a fost utilizată și evaluată în contextul provocării SemEval 2018 (sarcina 2, subsarcina 1).', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo metodologiju predviđanja emoji u tweetima. Naš pristup je baziran na klasiènom modelu torbe reèi zajedno sa reèima ukljuèenim. Koristio je klasifikacijski algoritam bio Logistička regresija. Ova arhitektura je korišćena i procjenjena u kontekstu izazova iz polovice 2018 (zadatak 2, podpitanje 1).', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ට්විට් වලින් එමෝජියි විශ්වාස කරන්න විද්\u200dයාව විස්තර කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය බෑග්-වචන් මොඩල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ විදියට අධාරිත වෙනවා. භාවිත විශේෂ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් ලොජිස්ටික විශේෂය. මේ ස්ථාපනය භාවිතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ සම්වේල් 2018 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ (ප්\u200dරශ්නය 2, ප්\u200dරශ්නය 1).', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид эмоджийг tweets дээр таамаглах аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний арга барилга нь үгнээс хамтдаа классик уут үгний загвар дээр суурилсан. Хэрэглэгдсэн ангилалын алгоритм нь Логистик Регрессийн байдал юм. Энэ архитектур 2018 оны SemEval-ын сорилтын тухай ашиглаж, үнэлэх болсон.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa qaabab aan ku sii sheegno emoji oo tweetka ah. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu waxay ku saleysan tahay muuqashada kaliga ah oo hadalka ku qoran. Algorithm la isticmaalay wuxuu ahaa Logistic Regression. Tirkirkan waxaa lagu isticmaalay oo lagu qiimeeyay daboolka SemEval 2018 dhibaatooyin (shaqo 2, subtask 1).', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi en metod för att förutsäga emoji i tweets. Vårt tillvägagångssätt bygger på den klassiska bag-of-word-modellen i kombination med ordinbäddningar. Den använda klassificeringsalgoritmen var Logistic Regression. Denna arkitektur användes och utvärderades i samband med SemEval 2018-utmaningen (uppgift 2, deluppgift 1).', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда эмоджияны таңдау үшін методологияны таңдаймыз. Біздің қасиетіміз сөздерді ендіру үшін классикалық сөздер үлгісіне негізделген. Қолданылған классификациялық алгоритм логистикалық регрессиясы. Бұл архитектура 2018 жылдың SemEval бақылауында қолданылды және бақылады (2- тапсырма, 1- сурет).', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முறைமையை விவரிக்கிறோம் முறையில் தொடர்ந்து உணர்ச்சியை முன்விரிவா நம்முடைய செயல்பாடு கிளாசிக் பாக் கூற்று மாதிரியின் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கியுடன். பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட வகைப்படுத்தப்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறைமை பதிவுருப்பு. This architecture was used and evaluated in the context of the SemEval 2018 challenge (task 2, subtask 1).', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ٹویٹوں میں emoji کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے ایک طریقہ کا مفصل بیان کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارا طریقہ کلاسیکی باتوں کی مدل پر بنیاد ہے جو کلاسیکی باتوں کی مدل کے ساتھ جمع ہوتی ہے۔ استعمال کیا گیا کلاسپیٹ الگوریٹم لوجیسٹیک ریگرس تھا۔ یہ معماری استعمال کی گئی اور ارزش کی گئی تھی semiEval 2018 چال کی کنٹنس میں (task 2, subtask 1).', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz o'zimni Twitterda hisoblash uchun foydalanuvchimiz. Bizning fikrimiz mumkin bir so'zlar bilan bir so'zlar bilan birlashtirish mumkin. Tafsilotlar algorithi Logistik boshqaruvi edi. Name", 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi mô tả phương pháp dự đoán biểu tượng trên Twitter. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi dựa trên kiểu túi chữ cổ điển kết hợp với sự nhúng vào từ. Thuật toán phân loại đã dùng là Hồi đáp lôgíc. Kiến trúc này được sử dụng và đánh giá trong kết quả thử thách SemEvl 208 (nhiệm vụ 2, phụ đề 1).', 'bg': 'В тази статия описваме методология за предсказване на емоджи в туитове. Нашият подход се основава на класическия модел торба с думи във връзка с вграждането на думи. Използваният алгоритъм за класификация е Логистична регресия. Тази архитектура е използвана и оценена в контекста на предизвикателството СемЕвал 2018 (задача 2, подзадача 1).', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir eine Methodik, um Emoji in Tweets vorherzusagen. Unser Ansatz basiert auf dem klassischen Wortbeutelmodell in Verbindung mit Worteinbettungen. Der verwendete Klassifizierungsalgorithmus war Logistic Regression. Diese Architektur wurde im Rahmen der SemEval 2018 Challenge (Aufgabe 2, Teilaufgabe 1) genutzt und evaluiert.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we een methodologie om emoji in tweets te voorspellen. Onze aanpak is gebaseerd op het klassieke bag-of-words model in combinatie met woord embeddings. Het gebruikte classificatiealgoritme was Logistic Regression. Deze architectuur werd gebruikt en geëvalueerd in het kader van de SemEval 2018 challenge (taak 2, subtaak 1).', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo metodologiju predviđanja emoji u tweetima. Naš pristup je baziran na klasičnom modelu torbe riječi zajedno s ugrađenim riječima. Koristio je klasifikacijski algoritam bio logička regresija. Ova arhitektura je korišćena i procjenjena u kontekstu izazova iz polovine Evala 2018 (zadatak 2, podpitanje 1).', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi en metode til at forudsige emoji i tweets. Vores tilgang er baseret på den klassiske pose-of-word model i forbindelse med ordindlejringer. Den anvendte klassifikationsalgoritme var Logistic Regression. Denne arkitektur blev brugt og evalueret i forbindelse med SemEval 2018-udfordringen (opgave 2, underopgave 1).', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan metodologi untuk memprediksi emoji dalam tweet. Pendekatan kita berdasarkan model tas-kata klasik bersama dengan pembenaman kata. The used classification algorithm was Logistic Regression.  This architecture was used and evaluated in the context of the SemEval 2018 challenge (task 2, subtask 1).', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما روش\u200cشناسی را برای پیش\u200cبینی ایموجی در توئیت توصیف می\u200cکنیم. روش ما بر اساس مدل کلاسیک کلاسیک کلمات متصل شده با کلمات متصل شده است. الگوریتم classification used was Logistic Regression. این معماری در محیط چالش نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ استفاده شده و ارزش داده شده است.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea njia ya kutabiri emoji katika twiti. Hatua yetu inatokana na muundo wa mfumo wa maneno ya klassiki kwa ushirikiano wa maneno. Ualgorithi uliotumika wa kutangaza ulikuwa ni ukandamizaji wa KiLogistic. Ujengo huu ulitumiwa na kutathmini katika muktadha wa changamoto ya SemEval 2018 (kazi 2, jukumu la subira 1).', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda emoji tweets içinde öňünden geçirmek üçin bir metodologi tasvir edip bilýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz klasik çaga sözleriň nusgasyna daýanýar. Ullanylan klasifikasyon algoritmi Logistik Regresi Bu arhitektura 2018-nji SemEval kynçylygynyň kontekstinde ulanyldy we çözüldi (görev 2, subtask 1).', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons 'n metodologie om emoji in tweets te voorskou. Ons toegang is gebaseer op die klassieke sak van woorde model in saam met woord inbettings. Die gebruikte klasifikasie algoritme was Logistiese Regresie. Hierdie arkitektuur is gebruik en evalueer in die konteks van die SemEval 2018 uitdrukking (taak 2, subtvra 1).", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 추문에서 이모티콘을 예측하는 방법을 묘사했다.우리의 단어 연결 방법은 고전적인 단어 삽입 모델을 바탕으로 한다.사용한 분류 알고리즘은 Logistic 회귀입니다.이 아키텍처는 SemEval 2018 도전(퀘스트 2, 하위 퀘스트 1)에서 사용되고 평가됩니다.', 'az': "Bu kağızda emoji'yi tweetlərdə tədbir etmək üçün bir metodoloji təsbir edirik. Bizim yaxınlığımız kelimelərlə birlikdə klasik çərgə-çərgə modeli ilə dayanılır. Qullanılan klasifikasiya algoritmi Lojik Reqrisiyası idi. Bu arhitektura 2018-ci SemEval challenge (2-ci task, 1-subtask) ilə istifadə edildi və değerlendirildi.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք էմոջի կանխատեսման մեթոդոլոգիան թվիթերում: Մեր մոտեցումը հիմնված է դասական բառերի պայուսակի մոդելի վրա, միասին բառերի ներգրավման հետ: Օգտագործված դասակարգման ալգորիթմն էր Լոգիստիկ ռեգրեսիան: Այս ճարտարապետությունը օգտագործվել է և գնահատվել 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԵվալ" մարտահրավերի կոնտեքստում (2-րդ խնդիր, 1-րդ ենթահարց):', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা টুইটে ইমোজিকে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার একটি পদ্ধতি বর্ণনা করি। আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা ক্লাসিক ব্যাগ-অফ-শব্দের মডেলের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে শব্দের সাথে যোগাযোগ করে। ব্যবহৃত শ্রেণীবিভাগ অ্যালগরিদম ছিল লোগিস্টিক নিয়ন্ত্রণ। সেমইভাল ২০১৮-এর চ্যালেঞ্জের প্রেক্ষাপটে এই স্থাপত্তা ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে এবং মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে (কাজ ২, সাবটাবাস', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë një metodologi për të parashikuar emoxhit në tweet. Përqafimi ynë është bazuar në model in klasik të çantës së fjalëve në lidhje me përfshirjen e fjalëve. Algoritmi i klasifikimit të përdorur ishte Regresioni Logjik. This architecture was used and evaluated in the context of the SemEval 2018 challenge (task 2, subtask 1).', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ኢሜጂን በTwitter ለመፍጠር የሚችሉትን የሥርዓት ማድረግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ Our approach is based on the classic bag-of-words model in conjunction with word embeddings.  መግለጫ ይህ የመዝገብ መሠረት የተጠቀመ እና በSemEval 2018 ውጤት ውስጥ በተመሳሳይ ነበር (ስራ 2፣ ደብዳቤ 1)', 'ca': "En aquest article, descrivim una metodologia per predir emoji en tweets. El nostre enfocament està basat en el clàssic model de sac de paraules en conjunció amb l'incorporació de paraules. L'algoritme de classificació utilitzat era la Regressió Lògica. Aquesta arquitectura va ser utilitzada i evaluada en el context del repte SemEval 2018 (tasca 2, subpregunta 1).", 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme metodiku predikce emoji ve tweetech. Náš přístup je založen na klasickém sáčku slov ve spojení se slovními vloženími. Použitým klasifikačním algoritmem byla Logistic Regression. Tato architektura byla využita a vyhodnocena v kontextu výzvy SemEval 2018 (úkol 2, podúkol 1).', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo metodologiju predviđanja emoji u tweetima. Naš pristup je baziran na klasičnom modelu torbe riječi zajedno s ugrađenim riječima. Koristio je klasifikacijski algoritam bio logička regresija. Ova arhitektura je korišćena i procjenjena u kontekstu izazova iz semiEval 2018 (zadatak 2, podpitanje 1).', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan menetelmä, jolla voidaan ennustaa emojit tweeteissä. Lähestymistapamme perustuu klassiseen sanapussimalliin yhdessä sanaupotusten kanssa. Luokitusalgoritmi oli Logistinen Regressio. Tätä arkkitehtuuria käytettiin ja arvioitiin SemEval 2018 -haasteen yhteydessä (tehtävä 2, alatehtävä 1).', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame meetodit emojide ennustamiseks säutsides. Meie lähenemine põhineb klassikalisel sõnakoti mudelil koos sõna manustamisega. Kasutatud klassifitseerimisalgoritmiks oli Logistiline Regressioon. Seda arhitektuuri kasutati ja hinnati SemEval 2018 väljakutse kontekstis (ülesanne 2, alaülesanne 1).', 'jv': 'Nanging papat iki, kéné pisan ngerti pertama karo emuji nang tuytir. Ndoleh dhéwé kuwi basa ning kelas-uwong modèl kuwi bagian-uwong karo akeh basa gambaran. Algorithm architecture iki dipunangé lan ngejaraké ning njuk sak cara-cara semebal 2008 (task 2, njuk 1).', 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo metodologijo za napovedovanje emojijev v tweetih. Naš pristop temelji na klasičnem modelu vrečke besed v povezavi z vgradnjo besed. Uporabljen klasifikacijski algoritem je bil Logistična regressija. Ta arhitektura je bila uporabljena in ocenjena v okviru izziva SemEval 2018 (naloga 2, podnaloga 1).', 'ha': 'In this paper, we describe a methodology to predict emoji in tweets.  Mataimakinmu na samar a kan misalin mai classic na-faɗi da ke haɗa maganar da aka shigar da shi. @ action: inmenu An yi amfani da wannan arziki, kuma an evaluce cikin muhallin the SemEV 2018-kanal (aikin 2, submarin 1).', 'he': 'In this paper, we describe a methodology to predict emoji in tweets.  הגישה שלנו מבוססת על מודל שקית מילים קלאסית בתוך קשר למילים. אלגוריתם הסווג השתמש היה חזרה לוגיסטית. הארכיטקטורה הזו השתמשה והעריכה בקשר לאתגר SemEval 2018 (משימה 2, subtask 1).', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཨ་མོ་ཇི་ལྟར་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་འདི་ནི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་གནད་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་བྱས་ཡོད། སྤྱོད་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་རྣམ་པ་ལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཆོག་ཐང་རེད སྒྲིག་འཛིན་འདི་སྤྱད་ནས་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁོར་ཡུག་2018་གི་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'EICA Team at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'pt': 'Equipe do EICA no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Recursos semânticos e baseados em metadados para previsão de emojis multilíngues', 'es': 'Tarea 2 del equipo de EICA en Semeval-2018: Características semánticas y basadas en metadatos para la predicción multilingüe de emojis', 'ar': 'فريق EICA في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: الميزات الدلالية والقائمة على البيانات الوصفية للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية متعدد اللغات', 'fr': "L'équipe EICA à SEMEVAL-2018 Task 2\xa0: Fonctionnalités sémantiques et basées sur les métadonnées pour la prédiction multilingue des emoji", 'zh': 'EICA团队在SemEval-2018务2:多言表情符号占者,语义元之功也', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のEICAチームタスク2 ：多言語絵文字予測のためのセマンティックおよびメタデータベースの機能', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर EICA टीम: बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी के लिए शब्दार्थ और मेटाडेटा-आधारित विशेषताएं', 'ru': 'Команда EICA на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Семантические и основанные на метаданных функции для многоязычного прогнозирования эмодзи', 'ga': 'Foireann EICA ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Gnéithe Séimeantacha agus Meiteashonraí-bhunaithe le haghaidh Réamhaithrise Emoji Ilteangach', 'hu': 'EICA csapata a SemEval-2018 2. feladaton: Szemantikus és metaadat alapú funkciók a többnyelvű emoji előrejelzéshez', 'el': 'Ομάδα στο έργο 2: Σημαντικά και Μεταδεδομένα χαρακτηριστικά για την πρόβλεψη πολλαπλών γλωσσών Εμόζι', 'it': 'Il team EICA al SemEval-2018 Task 2: funzionalità semantiche e basate sui metadati per la previsione di emoji multilingue', 'lt': 'EICA Team at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ka': 'EICA ჯგუფი semiEval-2018 დავალება 2: მეტადატური და მეტადატური ფუნქციები მრავალური ემოჯიის წინაწყისთვის', 'kk': 'EICA тобы 2- жартық Eval- 2018 тапсырмасында: бірнеше тілдік эмози бағдарламасының семантикалық және метадақпарат негіздеген мүмкіндіктері', 'ms': 'Pasukan EICA di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Features Semantic and Metadata-based for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'mt': 'It-Tim tal-EICA fis-SemEval-2018 Kompitu 2: Karatteristiċi Semantiċi u bbażati fuq Metadejta għat-Tbassir Emoji Multilingwi', 'no': 'EICA-gruppe på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2: Semantiske og metadata-baserte funksjonar for fleirspråk emoji- forhåndsvising', 'mn': 'EICA баг нь semiEval-2018 Task 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'mk': 'ЕИКА тимот на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Семантични и метадададани карактеристики за повеќејазични предвидувања на емои', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2- ലെ എക്സാ ടീം: പല ഭാഷ എമോജിയുടെ മുന്നിലുള്ള സെമാന്റിക്കും മെറ്റാഡാത്ത അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വിശേഷ', 'pl': 'Zespół EICA w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Funkcje semantyczne i metadane dla prognozowania wielojęzycznych emoji', 'ro': 'Echipa EICA la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Caracteristici semantice și bazate pe metadate pentru predicția emoji multilingvă', 'so': 'EICA Team at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் EICA குழு 2: பல மொழி எமோஜி முன்னுரிமை', 'sr': 'Tim EICA-a na zadatku 2. polu-Eval-2018: semantičke i metadatu bazirane karakteristike za višejezičku predviđanje emoji', 'si': 'EICA කණ්ඩායම් සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩේ 2: සෙමාන්ටික් සහ මෙටාඩාටාටා අධාරිත විශේෂතාවක් ගොඩක් භාෂාවික එමෝජි ප', 'ur': 'ایسیکا تیم ٹیم ۲۰۱۸ ٹاکس ۲: سیمنٹی اور متڈیٹا بنیاد رکھی ہوئی متعدی زبان ایموجی پیش بینی کے لئے', 'sv': 'EICA-teamet på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Semantiska och metadatabaserade funktioner för flerspråkig emoji förutsägelse', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tổ chức tác động Mùa lắc tại Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task 2: Trung tâm và siêu dữ liệu cho động cơ đa ngôn ngữ Emoji dự đoán', 'nl': 'EICA Team bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Semantische en metadata gebaseerde functies voor meertalige Emoji voorspelling', 'hr': 'Ekipa EICA-a na zadatku 2. polu-Eval-2018: semantičke i metadatosne funkcije za višejezičku predviđanje emoji', 'da': 'EICA Team på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Semantiske og metadatabaserede funktioner til flersprogede emoji forudsigelse', 'bg': 'Екип на ЕИКБ на Задача 2: Семантични и метаданни базирани функции за прогнозиране на многоезични емоджи', 'de': 'EICA Team bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Semantische und metadatenbasierte Funktionen für mehrsprachige Emoji-Vorhersagen', 'ko': 'EICA팀이SemEval-18 임무2: 의미와 메타데이터를 바탕으로 하는 다국어 표정 예측 기능', 'id': 'Tim EICA di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Features Semantic and Metadata-based for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'fa': 'تیم EICA در ماموریت ۲۰۱۸: ویژه\u200cهای پایین و متداد\u200cهای زیادی برای پیشنهاد اموژی\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cها', 'tr': 'EICA Team at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'sq': 'Ekipi EICA në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'af': 'EICA-Skep by SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Semantiese en Metadata-gebaseerde eienskappe vir Multilingual Emoji Voorskou', 'sw': 'Timu ya EICA katika Tamko la SemEval-2018 2: Tamko zilizoko kwenye lugha nyingi za Emoji', 'am': 'EICA Team at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'bs': 'Ekipa EICA-a na zadatku 2. polu-Eval-2018: semantičke i metadatosne funkcije za višejezičku predviđanje emoji', 'hy': 'EICA Team at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ca': "L'equip EICA a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction", 'az': 'EICA Takımı 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction üçün Semantik və Metadata-based Features for Semantic and Metadata-based Features at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'et': 'EICA meeskond SemEval-2018 ülesandel 2: Semantilised ja metaandmepõhised funktsioonid mitmekeelse emoji prognoosimiseks', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: বহুভাষাভাষী ইমোজি ভিত্তিক এবং মেটাডাতা ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'cs': 'Úkol 2: Funkce založené na sémantických a metadatech pro předpověď vícejazyčných emoji', 'fi': 'EICA Team SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Semanttiset ja metatietopohjaiset ominaisuudet monikieliseen emojiennusteeseen', 'jv': 'EMIA Group at semi-contest task 2: semanti and metadata-supported Options for Multilanguage emuji predikion', 'he': 'צוות EICA ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 2: תכונות סמנטיות ומטאדיטות מבוססות על מטאדיטות', 'ha': 'Team na EICA at SemEl-2018 Tafiyar 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for multiziman Emoji Prediction', 'sk': 'Ekipa EICA na SemEval-2018 2. naloga: Semantne in metapodatkovne funkcije za napoved večjezičnih emojijev', 'bo': 'EICA Team at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Semantic and Metadata-based Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction'}
{'en': 'The advent of social media has brought along a novel way of communication where meaning is composed by combining short text messages and visual enhancements, the so-called emojis. We describe our system for participating in SemEval-2018 Task 2 on Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Our approach relies on combining a rich set of various types of features : semantic and metadata. The most important types turned out to be the metadata feature. In subtask 1 : Emoji Prediction in English, our primary submission obtain a MAP of 16.45, Precision of 31.557, Recall of 16.771 and Accuracy of 30.992.', 'ar': 'جلب ظهور وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي طريقة جديدة للتواصل حيث يتكون المعنى من خلال الجمع بين الرسائل النصية القصيرة والتحسينات المرئية ، ما يسمى بالرموز التعبيرية. نحن نصف نظامنا للمشاركة في SemEval-2018 Task 2 حول توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات. يعتمد نهجنا على الجمع بين مجموعة غنية من أنواع مختلفة من الميزات: الدلالية والبيانات الوصفية. تبين أن أهم الأنواع هي ميزة البيانات الوصفية. في المهمة الفرعية 1: توقع الرموز التعبيرية باللغة الإنجليزية ، حصلنا الأساسي على خريطة 16.45 ودقة 31.557 واستدعاء 16.771 ودقة 30.992.', 'es': 'La llegada de las redes sociales ha traído consigo una forma novedosa de comunicación en la que el significado se compone de la combinación de mensajes de texto cortos y mejoras visuales, los llamados emojis. Describimos nuestro sistema para participar en la Tarea 2 de SemeVal-2018 sobre predicción multilingüe de emojis. Nuestro enfoque se basa en combinar un amplio conjunto de varios tipos de funciones: semántica y metadatos. Los tipos más importantes resultaron ser la función de metadatos. En la subtarea 1: Predicción de Emoji en inglés, nuestro envío principal obtiene un MAP de 16,45, Precisión de 31,557, Retirada de 16,771 y Precisión de 30,992.', 'fr': "L'avènement des réseaux sociaux a donné naissance à un nouveau mode de communication où le sens est composé en combinant de courts messages texte et des améliorations visuelles, les emojis. Nous décrivons notre système pour participer à la tâche 2 de SEMEVAL-2018 sur la prédiction multilingue des emoji. Notre approche repose sur la combinaison d'un ensemble riche de différents types de fonctionnalités\xa0: sémantique et métadonnées. Les types les plus importants se sont avérés être la fonctionnalité de métadonnées. Dans la sous-tâche 1\xa0: Prédiction Emoji en anglais, notre soumission principale obtient une MAP de 16,45, une précision de 31,557, un rappel de 16,771 et une précision de 30,992.", 'pt': 'O advento das mídias sociais trouxe uma nova forma de comunicação onde o significado é composto pela combinação de mensagens de texto curtas e aprimoramentos visuais, os chamados emojis. Descrevemos nosso sistema para participar da Tarefa 2 do SemEval-2018 sobre previsão de emojis multilíngues. Nossa abordagem baseia-se na combinação de um rico conjunto de vários tipos de recursos: semânticos e metadados. Os tipos mais importantes acabaram sendo o recurso de metadados. Na subtarefa 1: Previsão de emojis em inglês, nossa submissão primária obtém um MAP de 16,45, Precisão de 31,557, Recall de 16,771 e Precisão de 30,992.', 'ru': 'Появление социальных сетей принесло с собой новый способ общения, где смысл состоит в сочетании коротких текстовых сообщений и визуальных улучшений, так называемых эмодзи. Мы описываем нашу систему для участия в задаче 2 SemEval-2018 по многоязычному прогнозированию эмодзи. Наш подход основан на объединении богатого набора различных типов признаков: семантических и метаданных. Наиболее важными типами оказалась функция метаданных. В подзадаче 1: Прогнозирование эмодзи на английском языке, наше первичное представление получить КАРТУ 16.45, точность 31.557, отзыв 16.771 и точность 30.992.', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアの登場は、短いテキストメッセージと視覚的な強化、いわゆる絵文字を組み合わせることによって意味が構成される、斬新なコミュニケーション方法をもたらしました。多言語絵文字予測に関するSemEval -2018タスク2に参加するためのシステムについて説明します。私たちのアプローチは、セマンティックとメタデータという、さまざまなタイプの機能の豊富なセットを組み合わせることに依存しています。最も重要なタイプは、メタデータ機能であることが判明しました。サブタスク1 ：英語での絵文字予測では、16.45のマップ、31.557の精度、16.771のリコール、30.992の精度を取得します。', 'zh': '社交媒体之所以致新者,义以合短(所谓表情符号)成也。 述我参SemEval-2018言表情符号占事2统。 吾道赖于组各种类型,语义元数据。 大抵元数功能。 在子职1:英语表情符号占中,我大要提交得MAP为16.45,精度为31.557,召还率为16.771,准确度为30.992。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया के आगमन ने संचार का एक नया तरीका लाया है जहां अर्थ छोटे पाठ संदेशों और दृश्य संवर्द्धन, तथाकथित इमोजी के संयोजन से बना है। हम बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 में भाग लेने के लिए हमारे सिस्टम का वर्णन करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण विभिन्न प्रकार की विशेषताओं के एक समृद्ध सेट के संयोजन पर निर्भर करता है: शब्दार्थ और मेटाडेटा। सबसे महत्वपूर्ण प्रकार मेटाडेटा सुविधा के लिए निकला। Subtask 1 में: अंग्रेजी में इमोजी भविष्यवाणी, हमारे प्राथमिक सबमिशन 16.45 का एक नक्शा प्राप्त करते हैं, 31.557 की परिशुद्धता, 16.771 की याद और 30.992 की सटीकता।', 'ga': 'Tháinig bealach nua cumarsáide le teacht na meán sóisialta ina bhfuil brí le chéile trí theachtaireachtaí gearra téacs agus feabhsuithe amhairc, na emojis mar a thugtar orthu, a chomhcheangal. Déanaimid cur síos ar ár gcóras chun páirt a ghlacadh i SemEval-2018 Tasc 2 ar Ilteangach Emoji Prediction. Braitheann ár gcur chuige ar shraith shaibhir de chineálacha éagsúla gnéithe a chomhcheangal: séimeantach agus meiteashonraí. Ba iad na cineálacha is tábhachtaí ná an ghné meiteashonraí. I bhfothasc 1: Emoji Prediction i mBéarla, faigheann ár bpríomh-aighneacht MAP de 16.45, Beachtas 31.557, Athghairm 16.771 agus Cruinneas 30.992.', 'hu': 'A közösségi média megjelenése új kommunikációs módot hozott magával, ahol a jelentést rövid szöveges üzenetek és vizuális fejlesztések kombinációjával, az úgynevezett emojik alkotják. Leírjuk a SemEval-2018 Task 2 többnyelvű emoji jóslásról szóló rendszerünket. Megközelítésünk a különböző típusú funkciók gazdag készletének kombinálására épül: szemantikai és metaadatok. A legfontosabb típusok kiderültek, hogy a metaadat funkció. Az 1. alcsoportban: Emoji Prediction angol nyelvű elsődleges beadványunk 16.45, 31.557 pontosságú MAP, 16.771 visszahívás és 30.992 pontosságú.', 'el': 'Η έλευση των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης έφερε μαζί τους έναν νέο τρόπο επικοινωνίας όπου το νόημα αποτελείται από τον συνδυασμό μικρών μηνυμάτων κειμένου και οπτικών βελτιώσεων, τα λεγόμενα εμόζι. Περιγράφουμε το σύστημά μας για τη συμμετοχή στο έργο 2 για την Πολυγλωσσική Πρόβλεψη Εμόζι. Η προσέγγισή μας βασίζεται στο συνδυασμό ενός πλούσιου συνόλου διαφόρων τύπων χαρακτηριστικών: σημασιολογικών και μεταδεδομένων. Οι πιο σημαντικοί τύποι αποδείχτηκαν ότι είναι η δυνατότητα μεταδεδομένων. Στην δευτερεύουσα ερώτηση 1: Πρόβλεψη στα Αγγλικά, η κύρια υποβολή μας λαμβάνει έναν χάρτη 16.45, ακρίβεια 31.557, ανάκληση 16.771 και ακρίβεια 30.992.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიატის გამოსახულება ახალგაზრდა კომუნიკაციის შესახებ, სადაც სანიშვნელობა კონტაქტიური ტექსტური შეტყობინებები და ვიზუალური გაზრუქებები, რაც ვუზები ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval-2018-ის მრავალური Emoji წინაწყებაზე გავამწერებთ. ჩვენი პროგორმაცია დახმარებულია განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებების ბედნიერი ნაწილის შეერთება: სემონტიკი და მეტადატატა. ყველაზე მნიშვნელოვანი ტიპები იყო მეტადატური ფუნქცია. 1-ში: ემოჯია წარმოდგენა ანგლისურად, ჩვენი პირველი წარმოდგენა 16.45-ის MAP, 31.557-ის წარმოდგენა, 16.771-ის და 30.992-ის წარმოდგენა.', 'it': "L'avvento dei social media ha portato avanti un nuovo modo di comunicazione in cui il significato è composto combinando brevi messaggi di testo e miglioramenti visivi, le cosiddette emoji. Descriviamo il nostro sistema per partecipare a SemEval-2018 Task 2 sulla Prediction Emoji Multilingual. Il nostro approccio si basa sulla combinazione di un ricco insieme di vari tipi di funzionalità: semantica e metadati. I tipi più importanti si sono rivelati la funzione dei metadati. Nel sottotask 1: Emoji Prediction in inglese, il nostro invio primario ottiene una MAP di 16.45, Precisione di 31.557, Richiama di 16.771 e Precisione di 30.992.", 'mk': 'Доаѓањето на социјалните медиуми доведе до нов начин на комуникација каде што значењето е составено со комбинација на кратки текстови пораки и визуелни подобрувања, т.н. емоџии. Го опишуваме нашиот систем за учество во SemEval-2018 задача 2 за мултијазична емоџиска предвидба. Нашиот пристап зависи од комбинацијата на богат сет на различни видови на карактеристики: семантични и метададани. Најважните типови се покажаа дека се метададаните. Во субпрашање 1: Предпоставувањето на Емоја на англиски, нашето примарно поднесување добива MAP од 16.45, прецизност од 31.557, повлекување од 16.771 и прецизност од 30.992.', 'lt': 'Socialinės žiniasklaidos atsiradimas sukėlė naują komunikacijos būdą, kuriame prasmę sudaro trumpų teksto pranešimų ir vizualinių patobulinimų derinimas, vadinamųjų emodžių. Mes apibūdiname savo dalyvavimo SemEval-2018 2 užduotyje dėl daugiakalbių emojų prognozių sistemą. Mūsų požiūris grindžiamas įvairių tipų savybių: semantinių ir metaduomenų derinimu. Paaiškėjo, kad svarbiausi tipai yra metaduomenų savybė. 1 paklausime: Emoji prognozė anglų kalba, mūsų pirminis pateiktas MAP 16.45, tikslumas 31.557, atmetimas 16.771 ir tikslumas 30.992.', 'ms': 'The advent of social media has brought along a novel way of communication where meaning is composed by combining short text messages and visual enhancements, the so-called emojis.  Kami menggambarkan sistem kami untuk berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2018 Tugas 2 tentang Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa. pendekatan kita bergantung pada kombinasi set yang kaya dari berbagai jenis ciri-ciri: semantik dan metadata. Jenis yang paling penting ternyata adalah ciri metadata. Dalam subtanya 1: Prediksi Emoji dalam bahasa Inggeris, penghantaran utama kita mendapat MAP 16.45, Precision 31.557, Recall 16.771 dan Accuracy 30.992.', 'kk': 'Қосымша мәтін хабарламаларын және көріністі көңіл көңіл деп аталатын көңіл-көңіл көңіл жасау арқылы жасалған соңғы медиақтар жасалған жаңа коммуникациялық жолын түсі Біз бірнеше тілді эмози таңдау үшін бірнеше тілді 2- тапсырмаға қатысу жүйесімізді таңдаймыз. Біздің қасиетіміз бірнеше түрлі мүмкіндіктерді біріктіруге тәуелді: semantic және metadata. Ең маңызды түрлер мета деректер мүмкіндігі болды. 1- суреттің асты сұрағында: Эмози бағдарламасы ағылшын тілінде, біздің негізгі суретіміз 16, 45- дәл, 31, 557- дәл, 16, 771- дәл және 30, 992- дәл дәл дәл жақсы болады.', 'ml': 'സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളുടെ ആവേശം ഒരു നോവല്\u200d വഴിയായി കൊണ്ടുവന്നിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം ചെറിയ വാക്കുകളും കാഴ്ചമുള്ള മെയിലു നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 2 ല്\u200d പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നതിനാണ്. നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തേക്ക് ഒരു സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് സെമാന്റിക ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ട ടൈപ്പുകള്\u200d മെറ്റാഡാറ്റ പ്രതിഫലമായിരുന്നു. സബ്ബജിന്റെ 1: ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ എമോജി പ്രിക്ഷന്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തി 16. 45 ന്റെ ഒരു MAP കിട്ടും. 31. 557 ന്റെ പ്രിസിസിസ്റ്റ്, 16. 771 ന്റെ', 'mt': 'The advent of social media has brought along a novel way of communication where meaning is composed by combining short text messages and visual enhancements, the so-called emojis.  Aħna niddeskrivu s-sistema tagħna għall-parteċipazzjoni fis-SemEval-2018 Task 2 dwar it-Tbassir Emoji Multilingwi. L-approċċ tagħna jiddependi fuq il-kombinazzjoni ta’ sett rikk ta’ tipi varji ta’ karatteristiċi: semantika u metadejta. L-aktar tipi importanti rriżultaw li huma l-karatteristika tal-metadejta. Fis-sottomistoqsija 1: Tbassir Emoji bl-Ingliż, is-sottomissjoni primarja tagħna tikseb MAP ta’ 16.45, Preċiżjoni ta’ 31.557, Rapport ta’ 16.771 u Preċiżjoni ta’ 30.992.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн хэвлэлийн ирээдүйн явдал нь холбоотой шинэ харилцааны шинэ арга зам болгодог. Энэ утга нь богино текст, харааны нэмэгдүүлэлт, ингэж нэрлэгддэг эмози. Бид SemEval-2018-ийн олон хэл Emoji хэлний таамаглалтын 2-р ажил дээр оролцох системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний арга зам нь олон төрлийн төрлийн өөрчлөлтийг нэгтгэдэг: semantic, metadata. Хамгийн чухал төрлүүд нь мета-өгөгдлийн хувьд байлаа. 1-р суралцах дотор: Эмози Англи хэл дээр бидний анхны суралцах нь 16.45, 31.557, 16.771, 30.992-р зөв байдал авдаг.', 'pl': 'Pojawienie się mediów społecznościowych przyniosło nowatorski sposób komunikacji, w którym znaczenie składa się poprzez łączenie krótkich wiadomości tekstowych i ulepszeń wizualnych, tzw. emoji. Opisujemy nasz system uczestnictwa w SemEval-2018 Task 2 na Wielojęzyczną Prognozę Emoji. Nasze podejście opiera się na połączeniu bogatego zestawu różnego rodzaju cech: semantycznych i metadanych. Najważniejszymi typami okazały się funkcja metadanych. W podzadaniu 1: Emoji Prediction w języku angielskim, nasza główna zgłoszenie otrzymuje MAP 16.45, precyzję 31.557, wycofanie 16.771 i dokładność 30.992.', 'no': 'Utviklinga av sosiale medier har ført til eit nytt måte kommunikasjon der mening er lagt ved å kombinere korte tekstmeldingar og visuelle forbetringar, dei så kalla emojis. Vi beskriver systemet vårt for delta i semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2 om fleirspråk emoji- forordning. Tilnærming vårt er avhengig av å kombinere eit rikt sett av ulike typar funksjonar: semantisk og metadata. Dei viktigste typane viste til å vera metadata- funksjonen. I underspørjing 1: Emoji Prediction in English, vårt primær submission får ein MAP av 16,45, Precision of 31,557, Recall of 16,771 and Accuracy of 30,992.', 'sr': 'Došlost društvenih medija donela je novi način komunikacije u kojem je smisao sastavljeno kombinacijom kratkih tekstskih poruka i vizualnih poboljšanja, takozvanih emoja. Mi opisujemo naš sistem za sudjelovanje u zadatku 2 od semiEval-2018 o višejezičkoj Emoji predviđanju. Naš pristup se oslanja na kombinaciju bogatog set a različitih vrsta karakteristika: semantičnih i metapodataka. Najvažniji tip ispostavilo se da su metapodaci karakteristika. U podpitanju 1: Predpoklada Emoji na engleskom jeziku, naša primarna predstava dobija MAP od 16,45, preciznost od 31,557, sećanje 16,771 i preciznost od 30,992.', 'ro': 'Apariția rețelelor sociale a adus de-a lungul unui nou mod de comunicare în care sensul este compus prin combinarea mesajelor text scurte și a îmbunătățirilor vizuale, așa-numitele emojis. Descriem sistemul nostru de participare la SemEval-2018 Task 2 privind predicția emoji multilingvă. Abordarea noastră se bazează pe combinarea unui set bogat de diferite tipuri de caracteristici: semantice și metadate. Cele mai importante tipuri s-au dovedit a fi caracteristica metadatelor. În subactivitatea 1: Predicția emoji în limba engleză, trimiterea noastră primară obține o MAP de 16.45, Precizie de 31.557, Recall de 16.771 și Precizie de 30.992.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමත්වයේ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් තියෙනවා කියලා තේරුම කොටස් පණිවිඩය සහ දිහ අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා සම්වේල් 2018 කාර්ය 2 වලින් විශ්වාස කරන්න. අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශේෂ වර්ගයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා: සෙමාන්ටික් සහ මෙටාඩේටා වැදගත් වැදගත් වර්ගයක් මෙටාඩේටා වර්ගයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වල එමෝජි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 16.45 වල, 31.557 වල, 16.771 වල සහ 30.992 වලින් අවස්ථාවක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'sv': 'Införandet av sociala medier har medfört ett nytt sätt att kommunicera där meningen är sammansatt genom att kombinera korta textmeddelanden och visuella förbättringar, de så kallade emojis. Vi beskriver vårt system för deltagande i SemEval-2018 Task 2 om flerspråkig Emoji Prediction. Vårt tillvägagångssätt bygger på att kombinera en rik uppsättning olika typer av funktioner: semantisk och metadata. De viktigaste typerna visade sig vara metadatafunktionen. I underuppgift 1: Emoji Prediction på engelska får vår primära inlämning en MAP på 16.45, Precision på 31.557, Återkallande av 16.771 och Noggrannhet på 30.992.', 'so': 'Macluumaadka bulshada ayaa soo saaray qaab xiriir ah oo ay micneheedu leedahay, kaas oo loogu yeedhay emojis. Waxaynu qornaa nidaamka ka qeybqaadashada SemEval-2018 shaqo 2 oo ku saabsan Heoji-horumarka luuqadaha badan. Dhaqdhaqaalahayagu waxay ku xiran tahay isku daryeelashada noocyo hodan ah oo kala duduwan: semantic iyo metadata. Noocyada ugu muhiimsan waxay u muuqatay inay tahay tayada metadata. Shaqada hoose 1: Heeji Prediction afka Ingiriiska, submission-horaadka ah wuxuu helaa MAP 16.45, Heeganka 31.557, Xuska 16.771 iyo xisaabta 30.992.', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا کی آواز ایک نئی بات کی طرح لے کر آئی ہے جہاں معنی تھوڑے ٹیکسٹ پیغام اور دیدھی اضافہ کرتی ہے۔ ہم اپنے سیسٹم کو سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۲ میں ملتی زبان ایموجی پیش بینی کے بارے میں شرکت کرنے کے لئے بیان کرتے ہیں. ہمارا طریقہ اس پر ہے کہ ایک بہت سی طریقوں کی خصوصی جمع کرنا ہے: semantic اور metadata. سب سے اہم طریقے موجود ہو گئے کہ مٹا ڈیٹا فوکتوری ہو گئے۔ Subask 1: Emoji Prediction in English, our primary submission obtained a MAP of 16.45, Precision of 31.557, 16.771 and accuracy of 30.992.', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகங்களின் ஆழம் ஒரு புதிய தொடர்பு வழியை கொண்டு வந்திருக்கிறது அதாவது சிறிய உரை செய்திகள் மற்றும் பார்வை மேம்படுத்துதல் மூலம்  We describe our system for participating in SemEval-2018 Task 2 on Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  எங்கள் அணுகல் சார்ந்து கொள்ளும் பணக்கூட்டு வகையான தன்மைகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும் பொருட்களை நம்புகிறது: அரை  மிகவும் முக்கியமான வகைகள் metadata குணங்களாக தெரியவில்லை. துணை பணியில் 1: எமோஜி விருப்பத்தை ஆங்கிலத்தில், எங்கள் முதன்மை கூறுதல் 16. 45 ஒரு MAP கிடைக்கும், 31. 557 திருப்பம், 16. 771 மற்றும் 30. 992 தொகுதி', 'vi': 'Sự xuất hiện của các phương tiện truyền thông xã hội đã mang đến một cách giao tiếp mới, nơi ý nghĩa được tạo ra bằng cách kết hợp các thông điệp văn bản ngắn và cải tiến hình ảnh, những biểu tượng gọi là biểu tượng. Chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống của chúng tôi để tham gia Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 2 về dự đoán đa ngôn ngữ Emoji. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta dựa trên việc kết hợp một loạt các đặc điểm khác nhau: ngữ pháp và siêu dữ liệu. Những kiểu quan trọng nhất hóa ra lại là tính năng siêu dữ liệu. Theo mức phụ đề 1: Emoji prediction in English, our primary departure to a MAP of 16.45, Precision of 3l.57, Recall of 16.77777771 and Chính xác of 30.999999999999992.', 'uz': "Social media'ning taqdimoti esa ma'lumot matn xabarlarini birlashtirish va ko'rinish imkoniyatlarini birlashtirish mumkin. Biz SemEval-2018 vazifani bir necha tillar Emoji diqqat bilan birlashtirish uchun tizimmizni anglatamiz. Bizning fikrimiz har xil turlarini birlashtirishga ishlatadi: semantik va metadata. Eng muhim turlar metadata moslamalari bo'ladi. Birinchi vazifa: Ingliz tilida Emoji Preziyasi, bizning birinchi muammolar 16.45 ga MAP, 31.557 davomida, 16.771 sohasida va 30.992 daqiqasini olish.", 'nl': "De opkomst van sociale media heeft een nieuwe manier van communiceren meegebracht waarbij betekenis wordt samengesteld door het combineren van korte tekstberichten en visuele verbeteringen, de zogenaamde emoji's. We beschrijven ons systeem voor deelname aan SemEval-2018 Taak 2 op Meertalige Emoji Voorspelling. Onze aanpak berust op het combineren van een rijke set van verschillende soorten functies: semantische en metadata. De belangrijkste types bleken de metadata feature te zijn. In subtaak 1: Emoji Voorspelling in het Engels, krijgen onze primaire inzending een MAP van 16.45, Precisie van 31.557, Recall van 16.771 en Nauwkeurigheid van 30.992.", 'da': 'Fremkomsten af sociale medier har medbragt en ny måde at kommunikere på, hvor meningen er sammensat ved at kombinere korte tekstbeskeder og visuelle forbedringer, de såkaldte emojis. Vi beskriver vores system til at deltage i SemEval-2018 Task 2 om flersproget emoji forudsigelse. Vores tilgang bygger på at kombinere et rigt sæt af forskellige typer funktioner: semantiske og metadata. De vigtigste typer viste sig at være metadatafunktionen. I underopgave 1: Emoji Forudsigelse på engelsk får vores primære indsendelse et MAP på 16.45, Præcision på 31.557, Tilbagekaldelse af 16.771 og Nøjagtighed på 30.992.', 'bg': 'Появата на социалните медии донесе нов начин на комуникация, където смисълът се състои от съчетаване на кратки текстови съобщения и визуални подобрения, т.нар. емоджи. Описваме нашата система за участие в задача 2 за многоезично прогнозиране на емоджи. Нашият подход разчита на комбинирането на богат набор от различни видове функции: семантични и метаданни. Най-важните типове се оказаха функцията за метаданни. В подзадача 1: Прогнозиране на емоджи на английски език, първичното ни подаване получава MAP от 16.45, прецизност от 31.557, припомняне на 16.771 и точност от 30.992.', 'hr': 'Došlost društvenih medija dovela je do novog načina komunikacije gdje je smisao sastavljeno kombiniranjem kratkih tekstskih poruka i vizualnih poboljšanja, takozvanih emojis. Opišemo naš sustav za sudjelovanje u zadatku 2 za polu Eval-2018 o višejezičkoj Emoji predviđanju. Naš pristup se oslanja na kombinaciju bogatog skupa različitih vrsta karakteristika: semantičkih i metapodataka. Najvažnije vrste ispostavilo se da su metapodaci karakteristika. U podpitanju 1: Predpoklada Emoji na engleskom jeziku, naša primarna predstava dobija MAP od 16,45, preciznost od 31,557, sjećanje 16,771 i preciznost od 30,992.', 'de': 'Das Aufkommen der sozialen Medien hat eine neuartige Art der Kommunikation mit sich gebracht, bei der Bedeutung durch die Kombination von kurzen Textnachrichten und visuellen Verbesserungen, den sogenannten Emojis, komponiert wird. Wir beschreiben unser System für die Teilnahme an SemEval-2018 Task 2 on Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Unser Ansatz basiert auf der Kombination einer Vielzahl verschiedener Arten von Funktionen: semantische und metadaten. Die wichtigsten Typen erwiesen sich als die Metadaten-Funktion. In Subtask 1: Emoji Vorhersage in Englisch erhalten unsere primäre Einreichung eine MAP von 16.45, Präzision von 31.557, Rückruf von 16.771 und Genauigkeit von 30.992.', 'ko': '소셜 미디어의 출현은 문자와 시각적 강화(이른바 이모티콘)의 조합을 통해 의미를 표현하는 새로운 교류 방식을 가져왔다.SemEval-18 다국어 표정 예측 퀘스트 2에 참여한 시스템을 묘사했습니다.우리의 방법은 풍부한 여러 가지 유형의 기능인 의미와 메타데이터를 결합시키는 데 의존한다.가장 중요한 유형은 메타데이터 특성이다.하위 퀘스트 1: 영어 표정 예측에서 우리의 초보 제출은 16.45의 지도, 31.557의 정확도, 16.771의 리콜율과 30.992의 정확도를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'The advent of social media has brought along a novel way of communication where meaning is composed by combining short text messages and visual enhancements, the so-called emojis.  Tunaelezea mfumo wetu wa kushiriki kazi ya SemEval-2018 kwenye Udhibiti wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji. Hatua yetu inategemea kuunganisha mfululizo wa utajiri wa aina mbalimbali: semantic and metadata. aina muhimu zaidi ilionekana kuwa utambulisho wa taarifa. Katika jukumu la 1: Utawala wa Emoji kwa Kiingereza, ujumbe wetu wa msingi utapata MAP wa 16.45, Uheshimu wa 31.557, Kukumbuka 16.771 na Heshima ya 30.992.', 'id': 'Kehadiran media sosial telah membawa dengan cara baru komunikasi dimana arti terdiri dengan menggabungkan pesan teks pendek dan peningkatan visual, yang disebut emoji. Kami menggambarkan sistem kita untuk berpartisipasi di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2 tentang Multilingual Emoji Prediction. pendekatan kita bergantung pada kombinasi set kaya dari berbagai jenis fitur: semantis dan metadata. Jenis yang paling penting ternyata adalah fitur metadata. Dalam pertanyaan 1: Prediksi Emoji dalam bahasa Inggris, pengiriman utama kita mendapatkan MAP 16.45, Precision 31.557, Recall 16.771 dan Precision 30.992.', 'fa': 'پیشرفت رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی راهی تازه\u200cای از ارتباطات آورده است که معنی با ترکیب پیغام\u200cهای کوتاه\u200cای و افزایش\u200cهای دیده\u200cای، به عنوان «emojis» ساخته می\u200cشود. ما سیستم خودمان را برای شرکت در تابع ۲۰۱۸ در مورد پیشنهاد Emoji Multilingual توصیف می کنیم. دستور ما بر ترکیب یک مجموعه ثروتمند از نوع ویژه\u200cهای مختلف است: semantic و metadata. مهمترین نوع\u200cها معلوم شد که ویژگی متداده\u200cها هستند. در زیر سوال ۱: پیشنهاد اموژی در انگلیسی، پیشنهاد اولیه ما MAP از 16.45 دریافت می\u200cشود، precision of 31.557, Recall of 16.771 and accuracy of 30.992.', 'sq': 'Shfaqja e medias sociale ka sjellë një mënyrë të re komunikimi ku kuptimi përbëhet nga kombinimi i mesazheve të shkurtër teksti dhe përmirësimeve vizuale, të ashtuquajturit emoji. Ne përshkruajmë sistemin tonë për pjesëmarrjen në SemEval-2018 Task 2 on Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Përqasja jonë mbështetet në kombinimin e një grupi të pasur të llojeve të ndryshme të karakteristikave: semantike dhe metatë. Tipet më të rëndësishme dolën të jenë metatë. Në nënpyetje 1: Predikimi Emoji në anglisht, paraqitja jonë kryesore merr një MAP prej 16.45, Precision prej 31.557, Recall of 16.771 dhe Precision prej 30.992.', 'tr': 'Sosyal mediýalaryň gelenini örän gysga mesajlary we görsel gelişmeleri bilen ýazylýan, şol diýip atlanmaklaryň a ňsatlyk bilen birleştirilýär. Biz öz sistemimizi SemEval-2018 Taýgyna 2-nji Dilli Emoji Prediksiýasynda goşulmak üçin tassykladyk. Biziň ýaryşymyz görnüş dürli özellikleriň baý bir toparyny birleştirmekde mümkin edýär: semantik we metadata. Iň wajyp türler metadata özellikleri bolupdyr. Subquestion 1: Emoji Prediction in English, our primary submission obtained a MAP of 16.45, Precision of 31.557, Recall of 16.771 and accuracy of 30.992.', 'hy': 'The advent of social media has brought along a novel way of communication where meaning is composed by combining short text messages and visual enhancements, the so-called emojis.  Մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր համակարգը, որտեղ մասնակցում ենք 2018 թվականի "Սեմվալ-2018" 2-ի "Բազլեզու էմոյի կանխատեսումը": Մեր մոտեցումը հիմնված է տարբեր տեսակի առանձնահատկությունների՝ սեմանտիկ և մետատվյալների հարուստ համադրման վրա: Պարզվեց, որ ամենակարևոր տեսակները մետատվյալների հատկությունն են: Առաջին ենթահարցում\' Էմոյի կանխատեսումը անգլերենում, մեր հիմնական ներկայացումը ստանում է 16.45, 31.557 ճշգրտությունը, 16.771 և 30.992 ճշգրտությունը:', 'af': "Die voorkoms van sosiale media het 'n nuwe manier van kommunikasie gebring waar beteken is gemeenskap deur die kombinasie van kort teks boodskappe en visuele verbeteringe, die so genoem emojis. Ons beskryf ons stelsel vir deelnadering in SemEval-2018 taak 2 oor Multilingual Emoji voorskrif. Ons toegang verlig op die kombinasie van 'n ryk stel van verskillende tipes funksies: semantiese en metadata. Die mees belangrike tipes het uitgeskakel na wees die metadata funksie. In subtask 1: Emoji voorskrif in Engels, ons primêre onderskrif kry 'n MAP van 16.45, Presisie van 31.557, Rekening van 16.771 en Naakkuraat van 30.992.", 'az': 'Sosyal mediyaların gəlməsi yeni bir komunikasyon yolunu göstərdi. Bu məsələn, kiçik məktub ismarışlarını birləşdirən və göylər artırmaqlarını, buna nazil edilən emojis-ləri birləşdirir. Biz sistemimizi çoxlu dil Emoji təsiri barəsində SemEval-2018 Gözəli 2-si ilə iştirak etmək üçün təsdiqləyirik. Bizim yaxınlığımız müxtəlif növbənöv tərzlərini birləşdirməyə təvəkkül edir: semantik və metadata. Ən möhüm növlər metadata fəaliyyətidir. Subquestion 1: Emoji Prediction in English, our primary submission obtained a MAP of 16.45, Precision of 31.557, Recall of 16.771 and accuracy of 30.992.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্রতিযোগিতার একটি উপন্যাস নিয়ে এসেছে যেখানে মানে সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সট বার্তা এবং দৃষ্টিশক্তি বৃদ্ধি সং আমরা সেমভাল-২০১৮ সালে অংশগ্রহণের জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেমের বর্ণনা করছি মাল্টিভাষায় ইমোজি প্রেসিডেশনে অংশগ্রহণের জন আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা নির্ভর করে বিভিন্ন ধরনের সমৃদ্ধ বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে যুক্ত করার উপর: সেমেন্টিক এবং মেটা সবচেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ধরন মেটেডাটা বৈশিষ্ট্য। ১ সাব কাজে: ইংরেজি ভাষায় ইমোজি প্রেশন, আমাদের প্রাথমিক প্রদান ১৬. ৪৫ এর একটি MAP পেয়েছে, ৩১.', 'am': 'የማኅበራዊ አውታር ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ አካባቢ የጽሑፍ መልዕክቶች እና የራእይ አካባቢዎችን በመጠቀም እና የተባለው ኢሜጂ በመጠቀም የመጠቀም የመግለጫ መንገድ አቀረበ፡፡ SemEval-2018 ስራ 2 በMultilingual Emoji Preference ላይ ለመግባት ስብሰባችንን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ልግስናችን ባለጠጋ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ዓይነቶችን በመቀላቀል ላይ ነው፤ የsemantic እና የmetadata፡፡ የጠቃሚ ዓይነቶች መሀከል መሆኑን ይመስላል፡፡ በትዊተር ስራ 1: የኢሜዮይ ግዛት በንግግሊኛ፣ የፊደል መልዕክታችን የ16.45 MAP፣ የ31.557 ቁጥጥር፣ 16.771 እና የ30.992 ቁጥጥር አግኝቷል፡፡', 'cs': 'Příchod sociálních médií s sebou přinesl nový způsob komunikace, kde se význam skládá z kombinace krátkých textových zpráv a vizuálních vylepšení, tzv. emoji. Popisujeme náš systém pro účast na SemEval-2018 Task 2 na Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Náš přístup spočívá v kombinaci bohaté sady různých typů funkcí: sémantických a metadat. Nejdůležitějšími typy se ukázalo být funkce metadat. V podúkolu 1: Emoji Prediction v angličtině, naše primární podání získává MAP 16.45, přesnost 31.557, stažení 16.771 a přesnost 30.992.', 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia tulek on toonud kaasa uudse suhtlemisviisi, kus tähendus koosneb lühikeste tekstisõnumite ja visuaalsete täiustuste kombineerimisest, nn emojidest. Kirjeldame oma süsteemi osalemiseks SemEval-2018 ülesandes 2 mitmekeelse emoji prognoosi kohta. Meie lähenemine tugineb mitmesuguste funktsioonide: semantiliste ja metaandmete rikkalikule kogumile. Kõige olulisemad tüübid osutusid metaandmete funktsiooniks. Alaülesandes 1: Emoji prognoos inglise keeles on meie esmane esitus MAP 16,45, täpsus 31,557, meenutus 16,771 ja täpsus 30,992.', 'bs': 'Došlost društvenih medija dovela je do novog načina komunikacije gdje je smisao sastavljeno kombinacijom kratkih tekstskih poruka i vizualnih poboljšanja, takozvanih emoja. Opišemo naš sistem za sudjelovanje u zadatku 2 za polu Eval-2018 o višejezičkoj Emoji predviđanju. Naš pristup se oslanja na kombinaciju bogatog set a različitih vrsta karakteristika: semantičnih i metapodataka. Najvažniji tip ispostavilo se da su metapodaci. U podpitanju 1: Predpoklada Emoji na engleskom jeziku, naša primarna predstava dobija MAP od 16,45, preciznost od 31,557, sjećanje 16,771 i preciznost od 30,992.', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisen median tulo on tuonut mukanaan uudenlaisen viestintätavan, jossa merkitys muodostuu lyhyiden tekstiviestien ja visuaalisten parannusten yhdistämisestä, niin sanotuista emojiista. Kuvaamme järjestelmäämme osallistua SemEval-2018 Task 2 on Multilingual Emoji Ennuste. Lähestymistapamme perustuu monipuolisen joukon erilaisia ominaisuuksia: semanttisia ja metatietoja. Tärkeimmät tyypit osoittautuivat metatietoominaisuudeksi. Alatehtävässä 1: Emoji Ennuste englanniksi, ensisijainen lähetyksemme saa MAP 16,45, Tarkkuus 31,557, Muistutus 16,771 ja Tarkkuus 30,992.', 'ca': "L'advent dels mitjans socials ha aconseguit una nova forma de comunicació on el sentit està compost combinant missatges curts de text i millors visuals, els anomenats emoji. We describe our system for participating in SemEval-2018 Task 2 on Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  El nostre enfocament es basa en combinar un conjunt ric de diversos tipus de característiques: semàntiques i metadades. Els tipus més importants van resultar ser la característica de les metadades. En la subpregunta 1: Emoji Prediction en anglès, la nostra presentació primària obté un MAP de 16,45, Precisió de 31,557, Recordament de 16,771 i Accuració de 30,992.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk media sothik dadi nganggo perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo nguasai perusahaan seneng nggawe tarjamahan lan ijol-ijol sing ngerasakno, omoji sing nganggo kno Awakdhéwé ngerasakno sistem kanggo nggawe ngulinakake semebal-2008 task 2 lan Multilanguage emuji predikion. Ndheke sampeyan ngubah dhéwé ngerasakno ning kegambar perkaran-perkaran: semanti karo metadata. Tipe sing ngomong pengguna sing nyimpen pengguna metadata kang metadata In Subquestion 1: emuji predikion in Inggris, the primary report we have a MAP of 16.4, Presision of 31.587, rectall of 16.7 and Akurasi of 30.9 2.', 'sk': 'Prihod družbenih medijev je prinesel nov način komunikacije, kjer pomen sestavlja združevanje kratkih besedilnih sporočil in vizualnih izboljšav, t.i. emojijev. Opisujemo naš sistem za sodelovanje v SemEval-2018 nalogi 2 o večjezičnem napovedovanju emojev. Naš pristop temelji na združevanju bogatega nabora različnih vrst funkcij: semantičnih in metapodatkov. Najpomembnejše vrste so se izkazale za funkcijo metapodatkov. V podnalogi 1: Napoved emojev v angleščini naša primarna predložitev pridobi MAP 16,45, natančnost 31,557, spomin 16,771 in natančnost 30,992.', 'ha': 'Kifin mutane na jamii ya zo da wani hani na kommuni, inda aka samo ma\'anarsa da kombinta matsayin rubutu da ƙaranci masu ƙaranci, da aka faɗa "Emjis". We describe our system for participating in SemEval-2018 Task 2 on Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  Mataimakinmu yana dõgara a koma da wasu irin mutane mãsu yawa: semantic da metadata. Nau\'in da suka fi girma ya zama tayari na metadata. In sub-aikin 1: Emoji Prediction in Inglizi, ma\'abũcin aikin mu iya sãmu MAP na 1645, Pres of 31.557, Recallin of 167.771 and Taurar of 30.992.', 'he': "ההופעה של התקשורת החברתית הביאה דרך חדשה של תקשורת שבה המשמעות מורכבת על ידי שילוב הודעות טקסט קצרות ושיפורים ויזואליים, האמוג'ים הנקראים. We describe our system for participating in SemEval-2018 Task 2 on Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  הגישה שלנו סומכת על שילוב קבוצה עשירה של סוגים שונים של תכונות: סמנטי ומטטאדאטה. הסוגים החשובים ביותר התבררו להיות תכונת המטאדאטה. תחת השאלה 1: אמואי Prediction באנגלית, ההצגה הראשית שלנו מקבלת MAP של 16.45, מדויק של 31.557, זיכרון של 16.771 ו מדויק של 30.992.", 'bo': 'མི་མང་གི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་དྲན་དུ་གཏོང་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་མཐོང་བའི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐོག་ལས་བཟོ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མ་ལག་གིས་SemEval-2018 ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་Multilingual Emoji Prediction ། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་འདིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཁྱད་པར་ཕྱོགས་རིང་དང་བསྡོམས་པའི་ཆ་ཕྲན་ཡིན་པས། ཆེས་ཤོས་གལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་རིགས་ནི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རེད། In subtask 1: Emoji Prediction in English, our primary submission obtain a MAP of 16.45, Precision of 31.557, Recall of 16.771 and Accuracy of 30.992.'}
{'en': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'ar': 'EmojiIt في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: نموذج شبكة عصبي متكرر فعال قائم على الانتباه للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية مع الكلمات المحاطة ببوابات الأحرف', 'fr': "EmojiIT à SemeVal-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: un modèle de réseau neuronal récurrent basé sur l'attention efficace pour la prédiction d'emoji avec des mots fermés par des caractères", 'pt': 'EmojiIt na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Um modelo de rede neural recorrente baseado em atenção eficaz para previsão de emojis com palavras fechadas de caracteres', 'es': 'EmoJIit en la tarea 2 de SemEval-2018: un modelo efectivo de red neuronal recurrente basado en la atención para la predicción de emoji con palabras cerradas de caracteres', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर EmojiIt: अक्षर गेटेड शब्दों के साथ इमोजी भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक प्रभावी ध्यान-आधारित आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018での絵文字タスク2 ：文字ゲーティングされた単語による絵文字予測のための効果的な注目ベースの再帰的ニューラルネットワークモデル', 'ru': 'EmojiIt на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Эффективная модель рекуррентной нейронной сети, основанная на внимании, для прогнозирования эмодзи с использованием символов синхронных слов', 'zh': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 务2:一效者,递归神经网络形也,所以用字符门控单词表情符号占也', 'ga': 'EmojiIt ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Samhail Líonra Néarach Athfhillteach Éifeachtach Bunaithe ar Aire le haghaidh Tuar Emoji le Carachtair Focail Gated', 'ka': 'Emojiit semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 2: ეფექტიური დაახლოებით განახლოებით ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელიName', 'hu': 'EmojiIt a SemEval-2018 2. feladat: Hatékony figyelem-alapú ismétlődő neurális hálózati modell az Emoji előrejelzéshez karakterekkel kapcsolt szavakkal', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: Ένα αποτελεσματικό μοντέλο επαναλαμβανόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων με βάση την προσοχή για την πρόβλεψη με χαρακτήρες Gated Words', 'kk': 'Емозит 2. тапсырмасының жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында: Эмозияның қайталанатын нейрондық желінің үлгісі таңбалармен біріктірілген сөздерді таңдау үшін эффективті қайталау үлгісі', 'it': "EmojiIt a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Un efficace modello di rete neurale ricorrente basato sull'attenzione per la previsione Emoji con caratteri Gated Words", 'mk': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'lt': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'ms': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'ml': 'എമോജിIt at SemEval- 2018 Task 2: A Effective Attention- Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'mt': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'mn': 'Emojiit at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'pl': 'Emojiit w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Skuteczny oparty na uwadze model powtarzającej się sieci neuronowej dla prognozowania Emoji z postaciami Gated Words', 'no': 'Emojiit ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2: Ein effektiv attentingsbasert gjentakelig nøyralnettverk- modell for Emoji- førehandsvising med teikn gata ord', 'ro': 'EmojiIt la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Un model de rețea neurală recurentă recurentă eficient bazat pe atenție pentru predicția emoji cu caractere Gated Words', 'sr': 'Emojiit na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 2: Efektivni model neuralne mreže na osnovu pažnje za predviđanje emoji sa rečima prikupljenim karakterima', 'si': 'Emosiit at HalfEvel-2018 Job 2: A Efctive Attension-based ආයුතික ජාලය මොඩල්', 'so': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'ta': 'EmojiIt at SemEval- 2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention- Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'sv': 'EmojiIt på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: En effektiv uppmärksamhetsbaserad återkommande neural nätverksmodell för emoji förutsägelse med tecken Gated Words', 'ur': 'ایموجیٹ سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس 2: ایک اثرات نائرل نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کے لئے اثرات جمع ہوئے کلمات کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'It at SemEval- 2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention- Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'vi': 'Emojiit at SemEvl-2008 Task 2: Một hiệu quả hoá hoá tập tin trả lời về thần kinh cho Emoji prediction with Ký tự lũy từ.', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Ефективен модел на повтаряща се невронна мрежа, базиран на вниманието, за прогнозиране на емоджи с символи, затворени думи', 'nl': 'Emojiit bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Een Effectief Aandacht-Gebaseerd Recurrent Neural Network Model voor Emoji Voorspelling met tekens Gated Words', 'hr': 'Emojiit na zadatku 2. poluvječna-2018: Efektivni model neuronske mreže na temelju pažnje za predviđanje emoji sa riječima skupljenim znakovima', 'da': 'EmojiIt på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: En effektiv opmærksomhedsbaseret tilbagevendende neural netværksmodel til Emoji forudsigelse med tegn Gated Words', 'de': 'Aufgabe 2: Ein effektives aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes wiederkehrendes neuronales Netzwerkmodell zur Emoji-Vorhersage mit Zeichen Gated Words', 'ko': 'SemEval-18에서 EmojiIt의 작업 2: 효과적인 주의 기반의 귀속 신경 네트워크 모델로 문자 선택 통사의 표정 예측에 사용', 'id': 'EmojiIt di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Sebuah Model jaringan neural yang berdasarkan perhatian yang efektif untuk Prediksi Emoji dengan Kata Berkumpul Karakter', 'fa': 'Emojiit at semiEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'sq': 'EmojiIt në SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'tr': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'af': "Emojiit by semiEval-2018 Opdrag 2: ' n Effektiewe aandag- gebaseerde herhaalde neurale netwerk model vir Emoji voorskrywing met karakters poort woorde", 'sw': 'EmojiIt kwenye SemEval-2018 Kazi 2: Mtandao wenye ufanisi wa Mtandao wa Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea kwa ajili ya Udhibiti wa Emoji na Characters Gathed Words', 'az': 'Emojiit at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: একটি কার্যকর মনোযোগ-ভিত্তিক নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক মোডেল এমোজি প্রেমিশনের জন্য এমোজি প্রদত্ত অক্ষর গেট শব্দ', 'bs': 'Emojiit na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 2: Efektivni model neuronske mreže na osnovu pažnje za predviđanje emoji sa rečima prikupljenim karakterima', 'hy': 'It in Haleewal-2018', 'am': 'it at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'ca': "EmojiIt a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Un model de xarxa neural recurrent basat en l'atenció efectiva per predicció d'Emoji amb paraules portades de caràcters", 'et': 'EmojiIt SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: tõhus tähelepanu-põhine korduv neurovõrgu mudel emojide prognoosimiseks märkide värvitud sõnadega', 'cs': 'Úkol 2: Efektivní model opakované neuronové sítě založený na pozornosti pro předpověď emoji s postavami Gated Words', 'fi': 'EmojiIt SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Tehokas huomiopohjainen toistuva hermoverkostomalli emoji-ennusteelle, jossa on merkkejä Gated Words', 'jv': 'EMojIt at semiinval-2020 task 2: an Effectative Attention-Based recurent Neral Network model for emuji predikion with character gated words', 'sk': 'EmojiIt na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: Učinkovit model ponavljajočega se živčnega omrežja, ki temelji na pozornosti, za napovedovanje emojijev z znaki zaprtih besed', 'he': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words', 'ha': 'It at SemEV- 2018 Task 2: An Effective Attitor-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Goted words', 'bo': 'EmojiIt at SemEval-2018 Task 2: An Effective Attention-Based Recurrent Neural Network Model for Emoji Prediction with Characters Gated Words'}
{'en': 'This paper presents our single model to Subtask 1 of SemEval 2018 Task 2 : Emoji Prediction in English. In order to predict the emoji that may be contained in a tweet, the basic model we use is an attention-based recurrent neural network which has achieved satisfactory performs in Natural Language processing. Considering the text comes from social media, it contains many discrepant abbreviations and online terms, we also combine word-level and character-level word vector embedding to better handling the words not appear in the vocabulary. Our single model1 achieved 29.50 % Macro F-score in test data and ranks 9th among 48 teams.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجنا الفردي للمهمة الفرعية 1 من SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction باللغة الإنجليزية. من أجل التنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية التي قد تكون موجودة في تغريدة ، فإن النموذج الأساسي الذي نستخدمه هو شبكة عصبية متكررة قائمة على الانتباه والتي حققت أداءً مرضيًا في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. بالنظر إلى أن النص يأتي من وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، فهو يحتوي على العديد من الاختصارات المتناقضة والمصطلحات عبر الإنترنت ، كما نجمع أيضًا تضمين متجه الكلمات على مستوى الكلمات وعلى مستوى الأحرف لتحسين التعامل مع الكلمات التي لا تظهر في المفردات. حقق نموذجنا الفردي 1 نسبة 29.50٪ ماكرو F في بيانات الاختبار ويحتل المرتبة 9 بين 48 فريقًا.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta nuestro modelo único para la subtarea 1 de SemEval 2018 Tarea 2: Predicción de Emoji en inglés. Para predecir el emoji que puede contener un tweet, el modelo básico que utilizamos es una red neuronal recurrente basada en la atención que ha logrado un rendimiento satisfactorio en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Teniendo en cuenta que el texto proviene de las redes sociales, contiene muchas abreviaturas y términos en línea discrepantes, también combinamos la incrustación de vectores de palabras a nivel de palabras y caracteres para manejar mejor las palabras que no aparecen en el vocabulario. Nuestro modelo único1 obtuvo una puntuación Macro F del 29,50% en los datos de las pruebas y ocupa el noveno lugar entre 48 equipos.', 'fr': "Cet article présente notre modèle unique pour la sous-tâche 1 de SemEval 2018 Task 2\xa0: Emoji Prediction en anglais. Afin de prédire les emoji pouvant être contenus dans un tweet, le modèle de base que nous utilisons est un réseau neuronal récurrent basé sur l'attention qui a obtenu des performances satisfaisantes dans le traitement du langage naturel. Étant donné que le texte provient des médias sociaux, il contient de nombreuses abréviations et termes en ligne divergents, nous combinons également l'intégration de vecteurs de mots au niveau des mots et des caractères pour mieux gérer les mots qui n'apparaissent pas dans le vocabulaire. Notre modèle unique1 a obtenu un score macro F de 29,50\xa0% dans les données de test et se classe au 9e rang parmi 48 équipes.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta nosso modelo único para a Subtarefa 1 da Tarefa 2 do SemEval 2018: Previsão de emojis em inglês. Para prever o emoji que pode estar contido em um tweet, o modelo básico que usamos é uma rede neural recorrente baseada em atenção que alcançou desempenho satisfatório no processamento de linguagem natural. Considerando que o texto vem das mídias sociais, ele contém muitas abreviações e termos on-line discrepantes, também combinamos a incorporação de vetores de palavras em nível de palavra e em nível de caractere para lidar melhor com as palavras que não aparecem no vocabulário. Nosso único modelo1 alcançou 29,50% de pontuação Macro F nos dados de teste e ocupa o 9º lugar entre 48 equipes.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in EnglishのSubtask 1に当社の単一モデルを紹介します。ツイートに含まれる可能性のある絵文字を予測するために、私たちが使用する基本的なモデルは、自然言語処理で満足のいくパフォーマンスを達成した注意に基づく再帰ニューラルネットワークです。テキストがソーシャルメディアから来ていることを考慮すると、多くの矛盾した略語とオンライン用語が含まれています。また、語彙に表示されない単語をより適切に処理するために、単語レベルと文字レベルの単語ベクトル埋め込みを組み合わせています。当社の単一モデル1は、テストデータで29.50 ％のマクロFスコアを達成し、48チーム中9位です。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हमारे एकल मॉडल को SemEval 2018 टास्क 2 के Subtask 1 को प्रस्तुत करता है: अंग्रेजी में इमोजी भविष्यवाणी। इमोजी की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए जो एक ट्वीट में निहित हो सकता है, हमारे द्वारा उपयोग किया जाने वाला मूल मॉडल एक ध्यान-आधारित आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क है जिसने प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में संतोषजनक प्रदर्शन हासिल किया है। यह देखते हुए कि पाठ सोशल मीडिया से आता है, इसमें कई discrepant संक्षिप्त रूप और ऑनलाइन शब्द शामिल हैं, हम शब्दावली में दिखाई नहीं देने वाले शब्दों को बेहतर ढंग से संभालने के लिए शब्द-स्तर और चरित्र-स्तर के शब्द वेक्टर एम्बेडिंग को भी जोड़ते हैं। हमारे एकल मॉडल 1 ने परीक्षण डेटा में 29.50% मैक्रो एफ-स्कोर हासिल किया और 48 टीमों के बीच 9 वें स्थान पर है।', 'zh': '本文向SemEval 2018 Task 2子1介我单英语表情符号。 推而表情符号之,其大体在意递归神经网络,网络取快意于自然语言。 念文本自社交媒体,其含缩写在线术语,合单词级与字符词向量嵌,以善处词汇表中未见之单词。 单1得29.50%于测试数据,Macro F得分得于48团队中排名第9位。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена наша единая модель для подзадачи 1 задачи 2 SemEval 2018: прогнозирование эмодзи на английском языке. Чтобы предсказать эмодзи, которые могут содержаться в твите, базовая модель, которую мы используем, - это рекуррентная нейронная сеть, основанная на внимании, которая достигла удовлетворительных результатов в обработке естественного языка. Учитывая, что текст исходит из социальных сетей, он содержит множество разночтений в аббревиатурах и онлайн-терминах, мы также объединяем встраивание слов на уровне слов и символов, чтобы лучше справляться со словами, которые не появляются в словаре. Наша единственная модель1 достигла 29,50% макро- F-балла в тестовых данных и занимает 9-е место среди 48 команд.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo ár múnla aonair i láthair Fothasc 1 de SemEval 2018 Tasc 2: Emoji Prediction i mBéarla. Chun an emoji a d’fhéadfadh a bheith i dtweet a thuar, is é an bunmhúnla a úsáidimid ná líonra néarúil athfhillteach aird-bhunaithe a bhfuil feidhmíochtaí sásúla bainte amach aige i bpróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha. Ag cur san áireamh go dtagann an téacs ó na meáin shóisialta, go bhfuil go leor giorrúchán neamhréire agus téarmaí ar líne ann, comhcheanglaímid freisin leabú veicteoir focal ag leibhéal na bhfocal agus ag leibhéal na gcarachtar chun láimhseáil níos fearr a dhéanamh ar na focail nach bhfuil sa stór focal. Bhain ár múnla aonair1 amach 29.50% Macra-F-scór i sonraí tástála agus tá sé sa 9ú háit i measc 48 foireann.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 2. feladat 1. alcsoportját: Emoji Prediction angol nyelven. Annak érdekében, hogy megjósoljuk a tweetben található emoji-t, az alapvető modell egy figyelem-alapú visszatérő neurális hálózat, amely kielégítő teljesítményt ért el a Természetes Nyelv feldolgozásában. Tekintettel arra, hogy a szöveg közösségi médiából származik, sok diszkrét rövidítést és online kifejezést tartalmaz, emellett kombináljuk a szó- és karakterszintű szóvektoros beágyazást a szókincsben nem szereplő szavak jobb kezelése érdekében. Egyetlen modellünk1 29,50%-os Macro F pontszámot ért el tesztadatokban, és a 9. helyen áll a 48 csapat közül.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ჩვენი ერთადერთი მოდელის სამუშაო დავალება 2018 წლის სამუშაო დავალება 2: ემოჯია სამუშაო ინგლისურად. იმისთვის, რომელიც შეიძლება tweet-ში შეიძლება იყოს, ჩვენ გამოიყენებთ მუშაო მოდელია, რომელიც ახალგაზრულებაში გამოყენებულია რეკურენტი ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც მიიღეთ საკ ტექსტის შესახებ სოციალური მედიაზე იქნება, რაც აქვს ბევრი განსხვავებული სიმბოლოები და ინტერნეტის სიმბოლოები, ჩვენ ასევე სიტყვების დონე და სიმბოლოების დონე სიტყვების გვეკტორის შემ ჩვენი ერთადერთი მოდელი1 მიღეთ 29,50% მაკრო F- სოფლიოს ტესტის მონაცემებში და სოფლიოს 9-ში 48 ჯგუფი.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία παρουσιάζει το μοναδικό μας μοντέλο στην Υποεργασία 1 της εργασίας 2: Προβλεπόθεση στα Αγγλικά. Για να προβλέψουμε τα emoji που μπορεί να περιέχονται σε ένα tweet, το βασικό μοντέλο που χρησιμοποιούμε είναι ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο βασισμένο στην προσοχή, το οποίο έχει επιτύχει ικανοποιητικές επιδόσεις στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη ότι το κείμενο προέρχεται από τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, περιέχει πολλές διακριτικές συντομεύσεις και όρους σε απευθείας σύνδεση, συνδυάζουμε επίσης την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων σε επίπεδο λέξης και σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων για τον καλύτερο χειρισμό των λέξεων που δεν εμφανίζονται στο λεξιλόγιο. Το μοναδικό μοντέλο μας πέτυχε 29,50% μακρο-σκορ στα δεδομένα δοκιμών και κατατάσσεται 9η μεταξύ 48 ομάδων.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бір үлгімізді 2018 жылдың 1- жарты тапсырманың 1- жарты тапсырмасына көрсетеді. 2- тапсырма: Эмози тапсырмасы ағылшынша. Твитте болуы мүмкін эмоджтерді таңдау үшін, біз қолданатын негізгі үлгі - таңдау негізгі невралдық желінде қайталанатын қайталанатын невралдық желі. Бұл Түзіндік тілдерді өңдеу үшін таңдау үші Мәтін әлеуметтік медиақтан келеді деп ойлап, оның көптеген қысқартулар мен онлайн терминдері бар, сондай-ақ сөз деңгейі мен таңбалардың деңгейіндегі сөздерді сөздерде көрсетпеген сөздерді жақсы қамтамасыз ү Біздің жалпы моделіміз 48 топ арасында 29,50% Макро F- нүктесі жасады.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta il nostro singolo modello al Subtask 1 di SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in inglese. Al fine di prevedere le emoji che possono essere contenute in un tweet, il modello di base che utilizziamo è una rete neurale ricorrente basata sull'attenzione che ha raggiunto prestazioni soddisfacenti nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Considerando che il testo proviene dai social media, contiene molte abbreviazioni discrete e termini online, combiniamo anche l'incorporazione di vettori di parole a livello di parola e carattere per gestire meglio le parole che non appaiono nel vocabolario. Il nostro modello unico 1 ha ottenuto un punteggio Macro F del 29,50% nei dati di test e si colloca al nono posto tra 48 squadre.", 'mk': 'Овој весник го претставува нашиот единствен модел за Subtask 1 of SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in English. За да се предвидат емоџите кои може да се содржат на Твитер, основниот модел кој го користиме е рецидентна нервна мрежа базирана на внимание која постигна задоволни резултати во обработувањето на природниот јазик. Со оглед на текстот кој доаѓа од социјалните медиуми, содржи многу дискреpantни кратенија и онлајн термини, ние исто така ги комбинираме зборовите на ниво на зборови и векторите на ниво на знаци вклучени за подобро да се справат со зборовите кои не се појавуваат во речникот Нашиот единствен модел1 постигна 29,50 отсто макро ф-оценка во тестовите податоци и се рангира на 9-тото место меѓу 48 тимови.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatomas mūsų vienintelis modelis „SemEval 2018“ 1 posėdžio 2 užduotis: Emoji Prediction anglų kalba. Siekiant prognozuoti emodžius, kurie gali būti įtraukti į tweet ą, pagrindinis model is, kurį mes naudojame, yra dėmesiu pagrįstas nuolatinis nervinis tinklas, kuris pasiekė patenkinamus rezultatus gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo srityje. Atsižvelgdami į tekstą, gautą iš social in ės žiniasklaidos, jame yra daug skirtingų santrumpų ir internetinių terminų, mes taip pat deriname žodžių ir ženklų lygio žodžių vektorių įterpimą siekiant geriau tvarkyti žodžius, kurie nėra žodyne. Mūsų vienintelis modelis1 pasiekė 29,50 proc. makro F balas bandymų duomenise ir 9-ąjį rangą 48 komandose.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan model tunggal kita ke Subtask 1 of SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in English. Untuk meramalkan emoji yang mungkin terkandung dalam tweet, model asas yang kita gunakan ialah rangkaian saraf berkurang berdasarkan perhatian yang telah mencapai prestasi yang menyenangkan dalam proses Bahasa Alami. Considering the text comes from social media, it contains many discrepant abbreviations and online terms, we also combine word-level and character-level word vector embedding to better handling the words not appear in the vocabulary.  Model tunggal kami mencapai 29.50% skor F-makro dalam data ujian dan baris ke-9 di antara 48 pasukan.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta l-mudell uniku tagħna għal Subtask 1 of SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in English. Sabiex jiġi mbassar l-emoji li jistgħu jinsabu fit-tweet, il-mudell bażiku li nużaw huwa netwerk newrali rikorrenti bbażat fuq l-attenzjoni li kiseb prestazzjonijiet sodisfaċenti fl-ipproċessar tal-Lingwa Naturali. Meta wieħed jikkunsidra t-test ġej mill-midja soċjali, fih ħafna abbrevjazzjonijiet diskrepanti u termini onlajn, aħna kkombinaw ukoll vettur tal-kelma fil-livell tal-kelma u fil-livell tal-karattru biex jimmaniġġjaw aħjar il-kliem li ma jidhrux fil-vokabulari. Il-mudell waħdieni1 tagħna kiseb 29.50% punteġġ F tal-Makro fid-dejta tat-testijiet u kklassifika d-9 fost 48 tim.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser vår enkelt modell til underoppgåva 1 av halvEval 2018 Oppgåva 2: Emoji- forordning i engelsk. For å foregå emoji som kan innehalda i ein tweet, er det grunnleggjande modellet vi brukar på oppmerksomhetsbasert rekurserande neuralnettverk som har oppnådd tilfredsstillende utføringar i naturspråk. I tillegg til at teksten kommer frå sosiale media, inneheld det mange forskjellige forkortingar og tilkoplingar, kombinerer vi også ordnivå og teiknevektor som innebyr ordvektoren for å bedre handtere ord som ikkje dukkar opp i ordboka. Vårt enkelt model1 oppnådd 29,50% makro F- poeng i test data og rekningar 9. mellom 48 grupper.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiono nasz pojedynczy model podzadania 1 SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction w języku angielskim. Aby przewidzieć emoji, które mogą być zawarte w tweecie, podstawowym modelem, którego używamy jest oparta na uwadze powtarzająca się sieć neuronowa, która osiągnęła satysfakcjonujące wyniki w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego. Biorąc pod uwagę, że tekst pochodzi z mediów społecznościowych, zawiera wiele rozbieżnych skrótów i terminów online, łączymy również osadzanie wektorów słowa na poziomie słowa i znaków, aby lepiej obsługiwać słowa niepojawiające się w słownictwie. Nasz pojedynczy model osiągnął 29,50% Makro F w danych testowych i zajmuje dziewiąte miejsce wśród 48 zespołów.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d എമോയി നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന് ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ടൂട്ടിയില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഇമോജിയെ പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നാം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ മോഡല്\u200d ആശ്ചര്യപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ന നെയൂറ ഈ ലേഖനം സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് വരുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ആലോചിച്ച് അതില്\u200d പലതും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങളും ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d വാക്കുകളുമുണ്ട്, വാക്ക് നില ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഒരേ മോഡല്\u200d 1 29.50% മാക്രോ എഫ് സ്കോര്\u200d പരീക്ഷണവിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d എത്തി. 48 ടീം കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d 9ആം നില്\u200dക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний ганц загварыг 2018 оны SemEval-ын 1 дахь дахь ажил 2: Эмози дахь англи хэлний хэлний төлөвлөгөө дэвшүүлдэг. Бидний хэрэглэдэг үндсэн загвар бол анхаарлын үндсэн сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээ, байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлд хангалттай үйл ажиллагааг гаргасан сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээ юм. Текст нийгмийн хэвлэлээс гарч ирдэг учраас, энэ нь олон төрлийн тодорхойлолтууд болон онлайн тодорхойлолтууд байдаг. Мөн бид үгийн түвшин болон харьцааны түвшин үгийн векторыг илүү сайн зохицуулахын тулд нэгтгэдэг. Бидний ганц загвар 1 нь шалгалтын өгөгдлийн хувьд 29.50% Макро F оноо, 48 багийн 9-р дүрс гаргасан.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ එකම ප්\u200dරමාණය පෙන්වන්නේ සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩේ 1 ප්\u200dරමාණය 2: එමෝජි ප්\u200dරමාණය ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වල. මූලික මොඩල් අපි භාවිත කරන්නේ පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්පූර්ණ භාෂාව සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණ විදිහට සම්පූර්ණ විදිහට ප්\u200d සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් පැත්තක් ගැන හිතන්න, ඒක ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සහ අන්ලයින් වර්තනය තියෙනවා, අපි වචනය-ලේවල් සහ අක්ෂර- ලේවල් වචනය ව අපේ එකම නිර්මාණය 1 කණ්ඩායම් 48 අතර 29.50% මැක්රෝ F- ස්කෝර් වුනා.', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu muujiyaa noocyadan oo kaliya ee sub-task 1 ee SemEval 2018 shaqo 2: Emoji Prediction afka Ingiriis. Si loo sii sheegayo emoji uu ku qoran karo Tweet, qaababka asalka ah ee a an isticmaalno waa shabakadda diimeedka oo dib u soo socda, kaas oo ku soo bandhigay sameynta afka asalka ah. Sida aad u fiiriso in qoraalku ka yimaado shabakadda bulshada, waxaa ku jira baabba'aan faro badan iyo af internetka ah, waxaynu sidoo kale ku darsameynaa qeybta hadalka saxda ah iyo qoraalka saxda ah si aad u hagaajisid hadalka aan afka ka ka muuqan. Tusaale kaliya 1 wuxuu gaadhay 29.50% Macro F-score oo ku qoran data imtixaanka oo kooxda 48 ka mid ah 9aad.", 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă modelul nostru unic la Subsarcina 1 a SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction în limba engleză. Pentru a prezice emoji-urile care pot fi conținute într-un tweet, modelul de bază pe care îl folosim este o rețea neurală recurentă bazată pe atenție, care a obținut performanțe satisfăcătoare în procesarea limbajului natural. Având în vedere că textul provine de pe rețelele sociale, conține multe abrevieri discrete și termeni online, combinăm, de asemenea, încorporarea la nivel de cuvânt și la nivel de caracter vector de cuvânt pentru a gestiona mai bine cuvintele care nu apar în vocabular. Modelul nostru unic1 a obținut 29,50% scor Macro F în datele de testare și se situează pe locul 9 în rândul celor 48 de echipe.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naš jedini model podzadatku 1 od pola Evala 2018. zadatak 2: Emoji Predikcija na engleskom jeziku. Da bismo predvidjeli emoji koji može biti sadržani u tweetu, osnovni model koji koristimo je ponovna neuralna mreža na pažnji koja je ostvarila zadovoljavajuće izvode u procesu prirodnog jezika. S obzirom na tekst dolazi iz društvenih medija, sadrži mnogo različitih skrovišta i online uslova, takođe kombiniramo i vektor riječi na nivou riječi i karaktera koji se uključuje da bi bolje rješavali riječi koje se ne pojavljuju u rečniku. Naš jedini model1 je postigao 29,50% makro F-rezultata u testovima i redovima 9. među 48 tima.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar vår enda modell till Subtask 1 av SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction på engelska. För att förutsäga emoji som kan finnas i en tweet, är den grundläggande modellen vi använder ett uppmärksamhetsbaserat återkommande neuralt nätverk som har uppnått tillfredsställande prestanda i Natural Language bearbetning. Med tanke på att texten kommer från sociala medier, innehåller den många diskreta förkortningar och online termer, kombinerar vi också ordnivå och teckenivå ordvektor inbäddning för att bättre hantera orden som inte visas i ordförrådet. Vår enda modell1 uppnådde 29,50% Macro F-poäng i testdata och rankas 9:e bland 48 lag.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval 2018 செயல் 2: எமோயி விருப்பங்கள் ஆங்கிலத்தில் எங்கள் தனிய மாதிரியை வழங்குகிறது. ஒரு சுட்டியில் இருக்கக்கூடிய உணர்வை முன்வாக்குவதற்கு, நாம் பயன்படுத்தும் அடிப்படை மாதிரி ஒரு கவனத்தை அடிப்படையில் திரும்பப் புதிய பிணையத்தில்  உரை சமூக ஊடகங்களிலிருந்து வரும் என்பதை கருத்து, அதில் பல வித்தியாசமான மாற்றங்கள் மற்றும் இணைய வார்த்தைகள் உள்ளது, சொல்லாக்கத்தில் தெரியாத வார்த்தைகளை  எங்கள் ஒற்றை மாதிரி 1 29.50% மாக்ரோ F- மதிப்பு பெற்றுவிட்டது சோதனை தரவுகளில் மற்றும் 48 குழுக்களில் 9வது நிலை', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہمارے ایک موڈل کو نصف ایولی 2018 ٹاکس ۲ کی سوب ٹاکس کے لئے پیش کرتا ہے۔ اِموجی کی پیش بینی کے لئے جو ایک ٹویٹ میں شامل ہو سکتی ہے، بنیادی موڈل جو ہم استعمال کرتے ہیں، ایک دہرائی نائرل نیورل نیٹ ورک ہے جو طبیعی زبان پردازی میں مطمئناً کامل ہوتی ہے. متن کو سوسیل میڈیا سے سمجھتے ہیں، اس میں بہت سی مختلف قطعے اور آنلاین کی شرایط ہیں، ہم لفظ سطح اور شخصیت سطح لفظ لفظ ویکتور کو بھی مختلف کررہے ہیں جو لفظ میں ظاہر نہیں ہوتے۔ ہماری ایک نمادل ۱ نے 29.50% مکرو F-اسکور کو آزمائش ڈیٹا میں پہنچایا اور 48 ٹیموں میں ۹م درجے پہنچایا۔', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval 2018 Vazifa 2: Emoji Prediction Inglizchaga bir modelmizni yaratadi. Twitterda ishlatiladigan emoji deb hisoblash uchun biz foydalanuvchi asosiy modeli taqdimot tarmoq, bu tabiiy tillar jarayonlarida murakkab amalga oshirilgan tarmoq. Matnni jamiyat media'dan kelishini tasavvur qilish uchun, bu yerda ko'p ajratilgan kuch'oyalar va tarmoq so'zlar mavjud, biz so'zlarni yaxshi ko'paytirish uchun so'z darajada va harflar darajada qo'llanmalarni birlashtiramiz. Bizning bitta modelmiz 29.50% Makro F scori sinov maʼlumotlarida yetdi va 48 guruhdagi 9 ta ta darajaga yetdi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu mẫu đơn của chúng ta trừ Loại 1 của SemEvl 2008 Task 2: mặc đoán Emoji bằng tiếng Anh. Để dự đoán biểu tượng có thể được chứa trong một tweet, Cơ chế cơ bản chúng ta dùng là một mạng thần kinh lưu động dựa vào sự chú ý, đã đạt được những thành tựu thỏa đáng trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Dựa vào văn bản đến từ các phương tiện xã hội, nó chứa nhiều loại viết tắt và các thuật ngữ trực tuyến, chúng tôi cũng kết hợp từ cấp và giá trị chữ ký để thao tác tốt hơn các từ không xuất hiện trong từ. Cách mô hình duy nhất của chúng tôi là 29.500kg Macro F-score trong dữ liệu thử nghiệm và xếp 9th trong đội 48.', 'bg': 'Тази статия представя нашия единен модел на Подзадача 1 на Задача 2: Прогнозиране на емоджи на английски език. За да се предскаже емоджито, което може да се съдържа в туит, основният модел, който използваме, е базирана на вниманието рецидивираща невронна мрежа, която е постигнала задоволителни резултати в обработката на естествен език. Като се има предвид, че текстът идва от социалните медии, той съдържа много дискриминационни съкращения и онлайн термини, ние също комбинираме вграждането на думи на ниво дума и на ниво знак, за да се справим по-добре с думите, които не се появяват в речника. Нашият единичен модел1 постигна 29.50% макро Ф-резултат в тестовите данни и се нарежда на 9-то място сред 48 отбора.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert ons enkele model voor Subtaak 1 van SemEval 2018 Taak 2: Emoji Prediction in het Engels. Om de emoji te voorspellen die in een tweet kan zitten, is het basismodel dat we gebruiken een attentie-based recidivierend neuraal netwerk dat bevredigende prestaties heeft bereikt in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal. Aangezien de tekst afkomstig is van sociale media, bevat het veel discrepante afkortingen en online termen, combineren we ook woord-niveau en teken-niveau woord vector embedding om de woorden beter te behandelen die niet in de woordenschat voorkomen. Ons single model1 behaalde 29,50% Macro F-score in testgegevens en staat 9e onder de 48-teams.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer vores enkelt model til Subtask 1 af SemEval 2018 Opgave 2: Emoji Prediction på engelsk. For at forudsige den emoji, der kan være indeholdt i en tweet, er den grundlæggende model, vi bruger, et opmærksomhedsbaseret tilbagevendende neuralt netværk, der har opnået tilfredsstillende resultater i Natural Language behandling. I betragtning af at teksten kommer fra sociale medier, indeholder den mange diskrete forkortelser og online termer, vi kombinerer også ord-niveau og tegn-niveau ordvektor indlejring for bedre at håndtere de ord, der ikke vises i ordforrådet. Vores enkeltmodel1 opnåede 29,50% Macro F-score i testdata og rangerer 9. blandt 48 hold.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naš jedini model podzadatku 1 od pola evaluacije 2018. zadatak 2: predviđanje Emoji na engleskom jeziku. Da bismo predvidjeli emoji koji se može uključiti u tweet, osnovni model koji koristimo je ponovna neuralna mreža na pažnji koja je postigla zadovoljavajuće izvode u procesu prirodnog jezika. S obzirom na tekst dolazi iz društvenih medija, sadrži mnogo različitih skraćenja i online uslova, također kombiniramo i vektor riječi na razini riječi i razini karaktera koji se uključuje kako bi bolje rješavali riječi koje se ne pojavljuju u riječi. Naš jedinstveni model1 postigao je 29,50% makro F rezultata u ispitivanjima podataka i redovima 9. između 48 tima.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt unser einzelnes Modell für Subtask 1 von SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Englisch vor. Um die Emoji vorherzusagen, die in einem Tweet enthalten sein können, verwenden wir ein aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes wiederkehrendes neuronales Netzwerk, das zufriedenstellende Leistungen in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache erzielt hat. Da der Text aus sozialen Medien stammt und viele diskrepante Abkürzungen und Online-Begriffe enthält, kombinieren wir auch Wortvektoren auf Wortebene und Zeichenebene, um besser mit Wörtern umzugehen, die nicht im Vokabular vorkommen. Unser Einzelmodell1 erzielte 29,50% Makro F-Score in Testdaten und belegt neun unter den 48-Teams.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan model tunggal kita untuk Subtask 1 of SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in English. Untuk memprediksi emoji yang mungkin terkandung dalam tweet, model dasar yang kita gunakan adalah jaringan saraf berkurang berdasarkan perhatian yang telah mencapai prestasi yang memuaskan dalam proses bahasa alam. Mengingat teks berasal dari media sosial, mengandung banyak singkat yang tidak jelas dan istilah online, kita juga menggabungkan vektor kata-level kata dan karakter-level untuk menangani kata-kata yang tidak muncul dalam vokabular. Model tunggal kami 1 mencapai 29,50% skor F Macro dalam data tes dan baris ke-9 diantara 48 tim.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تنها مدل ما را به زیر کار ۱ از نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ نشان می دهد: پیشنهاد اموژی در انگلیسی. برای پیش بینی کردن ایموجی که ممکن است در یک توئیت حاوی شود، مدل بنیادی که ما استفاده می کنیم یک شبکه عصبی بازگشت بر روی توجه است که در پردازش زبان طبیعی به انجام\u200cهای راضی رسیده است. با توجه به متن از رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی می\u200cآید، در آن بسیاری از ترکیب\u200cهای مختلف و ترکیب\u200cهای آنلاین وجود دارد، ما همچنین ویکتور کلمه\u200cهای سطح و سطح شخصیت را ترکیب می\u200cکنیم تا بهتر کنترل کردن کلمه\u200cهایی که در کلمه\u200cهای مشخص نشده یک نمونه ۱ از ۲۹.۵۰ درصد مکرو فو در داده\u200cهای آزمایش و درجه ۹م بین ۴۸ تیم رسید.', 'ko': '본고는 우리의 단일 모델을 SemEval 2018 퀘스트 2의 하위 퀘스트 1: 영어 표정 예측에 소개한다.추문에 포함될 수 있는 이모티콘을 예측하기 위해 우리가 사용하는 기본 모델은 주의를 바탕으로 하는 귀속신경 네트워크로 자연 언어 처리에서 만족스러운 성능을 얻었다.텍스트가 소셜 미디어에서 온 것을 감안하여 다양한 줄임말과 온라인 용어를 포함하고 있음을 감안하여 우리는 어휘표에 나타나지 않은 단어를 더욱 잘 처리하기 위해 단어급과 문자급 단어 벡터를 결합시켰다.우리의 단일 모델 1은 테스트 데이터에서 29.50%의 거시적 F 점수를 얻었고 48개 팀 중 9위를 차지했다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha mtindo wetu wa moja kwa moja kwenye kazi 1 ya SemEval 2018 Kazi 2: Utawala wa Emoji kwa Kiingereza. Ili kutabiri hisia ambazo inaweza kuweka kwenye twiti, mtindo wa msingi tunaotumia ni mtandao wa kisasa unaoendelea kwa mtazamo unaoendelea na utaratibu wa lugha ya asili. Considering the text comes from social media, it contains many discrepant abbreviations and online terms, we also combine word-level and character-level word vector embedding to better handling the words not appear in the vocabulary.  Mfano wetu mmoja ulifanikiwa kwa asilimia 29.50 ya Macro F katika takwimu za jaribio na kuwepo nafasi ya 9 kati ya timu 48.', 'am': 'ይህም ፕሮግራም አንዱን ዓይነት ለስራ 1 የSemEval 2018 ስራ 2: ኢሜጂ መግለጫ በንግልዝኛ ነው፡፡ በትዊተር ውስጥ የሚደረገውን emoji ለመቀበል ለመጠየቅ፣ የምንጠቀም መሠረት የዳግመኛ የደካማ መረብ ነው፡፡ Considering the text comes from social media, it contains many discrepant abbreviations and online terms, we also combine word-level and character-level word vector embedding to better handling the words not appear in the vocabulary.  አንዲት ሞዴል1 በመክፈት ዳታዎች 29.50 በመቶ ማክሮ F-score አግኝቷል፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň ýekeje nusgamyzy 1-nji ýarym baýramyza 2018-nji Görevi 2: Emoji Öňlisçe. Emojileriň týutede bolan ýagdaýyny çaklamak üçin, ullanýan esasy nusgadyr, tebigy dil işlemesinde nähili ýeterlik gazanýan nusgadyr. Metin sosyal medýdandan gelenini düşünýän bolsa, bu sözleriň sözlerinde görünmemeýän sözleri gowurak ýöne çykarmak üçin köp näçe sözleri we karakterleriň derejesini birleştirip bilýäris. Biziň ýekeje modelimiz 48 topardan 29.50% Makro F अंतर tapdy.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel ons enkele model aan Subtaak 1 van SemEval 2018 Taak 2: Emoji voorskrif in Engels. Om die emoji te voorskou wat dalk in 'n tweet bevat kan word, is die basiese model wat ons gebruik is 'n aandag-gebaseerde rekursieerde neuralnetwerk wat verstandige uitvoerings in Natuurlike taal-prosessering bereik het. Omdat die teks van sosiale media kom, bevat dit baie verskillende kruifbreidings en online terme, kombinieer ons ook woord-vlak en karaktervlak-woord-vektor wat inbêer word om die woorde te behandel wat nie in die woordeboek verskyn word nie. Ons enkele model1 het 29.50% Makro F- score in toets data en rank 9de onder 48 teame bereik.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet model in tonë të vetëm për Subtask 1 of SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in English. Me qëllim që të parashikojmë emoxhin që mund të përmbajet në një tweet, modeli bazë që përdorim është një rrjet neural i përtëritshëm i bazuar në vëmendje që ka arritur rezultate të kënaqshme në procesimin e gjuhës natyrore. Duke konsideruar tekstin vjen nga media sociale, përmban shumë shkurtime diskrepante dhe terma në internet, ne gjithashtu kombinojmë nivelin e fjalëve dhe vektorin e nivelit të karakterit për të përmbajtur më mirë fjalët që nuk shfaqen në fjalorë. Modeli ynë i vetmuar1 arriti 29.50% makro-F në të dhënat e testit dhe renditet i nënti midis 48 ekipave.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim tək modelimizi 2018 yarısının 1-sinin Subtask 2-sinin: Emoji Prediction in English. Tövidə daxil olaraq emoji təmin etmək üçün, bizim istifadə etdiyimiz əsas modellər, təbiətli dil işləməsində təmin edilən təsirli nöral a ğdır. Mətn sosyal media tərəfindən gəldiyini düşünürək, bu sözlərdə görünməyən sözləri daha yaxşı idarə etmək üçün çox müxtəlif qısqa və onlayn şartları içərir. Bizim tək modelimiz 48 dəstə arasında 29,50% Makro F-score tapdı.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি আমাদের একক মডেল সেমইভাল ২০১৮ সালের সাবকাজের ১ কাজের কাজ ২: ইংরেজী ভাষায় ইমোজি প্রেশন। একটি টুইটে যে ইমোজিকে উপলব্ধি করতে পারে তা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য, আমরা যে মৌলিক মডেল ব্যবহার করি তা হচ্ছে পুনরায় মনোযোগের নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক যা প্রাকৃতিক এই লেখাটি সামাজিক মিডিয়া থেকে এসেছে বিবেচনা করে এটির মধ্যে অনেক বিচ্ছিন্ন ভাবে বিচ্ছিন্ন ভাবে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে এবং অনলাইনের শর্ত রয়েছে, আমরা শব্দভাণ্ডার আমাদের এক মডেল ১ পরীক্ষার তথ্যে ২৯.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta el nostre únic model a la Subtasca 1 de SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction en anglès. Per predir les emoji que poden contenir-se en un tweet, el model bàsic que utilitzem és una xarxa neural recurrent basada en l'atenció que ha aconseguit resultats satisfactoris en el processament del llenguatge natural. Considerant que el text prové dels mitjans socials, conté moltes abreviatures discrepants i termes en línia, també combinam un vector de paraules de nivell de paraules i de caràcter incorporat per a manejar millor les paraules que no apareixen al vocabulari. El nostre únic model1 va aconseguir un 29,50% de puntuació macro-F en les dades de prova i es va classificar en el nou lloc entre 48 equips.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje náš jediný model pro Subúlohu 1 SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction v angličtině. Pro předpověď emoji, které mohou být obsaženy ve tweetu, je základním modelem, který používáme, rekurentní neuronová síť založená na pozornosti, která dosáhla uspokojivých výkonů ve zpracování přírodního jazyka. Vzhledem k tomu, že text pochází ze sociálních médií, obsahuje mnoho diskrepantních zkratek a online termínů, také kombinujeme vkládání slovních vektorů na úrovni slova a znaků pro lepší zpracování slov, která se ve slovní zásobě neobjevují. Náš jednotlivý model1 dosáhl 29,50% makro F-skóre v testovacích datech a má deváté místo mezi 48 týmy.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է մեր մեկ մոդելը 2018 թվականի ՍեմԷվալ 1-ի 2-ի. Էմոյի կանխատեսումը անգլերենով: In order to predict the emoji that may be contained in a tweet, the basic model we use is an attention-based recurrent neural network which has achieved satisfactory performs in Natural Language processing.  Եթե հաշվի առնենք, որ տեքստը գալիս է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներից, այն պարունակում է բազմաթիվ տարբեր կարճումներ և առցանց տերմիններ, մենք նաև համադրում ենք բառերի և բնորոշների մակարդակի բառերի վեկտոր, որպեսզի ավելի լավ վերահսկենք բառերը, որոն Մեր միակ մոդել1 ստացավ 29.50 տոկոս Մակրո Ֆ-գնահատականներ թեստերի տվյալներում, իսկ 48 թիմերի 9-րդ գնահատականը:', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naš jedini model podzadatku 1 od semiEvala 2018. zadatak 2: Emoji Prediction na engleskom jeziku. Da bi predvidjeli emoji koji bi mogli biti sadržani u tweetu, osnovni model koji koristimo je ponovna neuralna mreža na pažnji koja je ostvarila zadovoljavajuće izvode u procesu prirodnog jezika. S obzirom na tekst dolazi iz društvenih medija, sadrži mnogo različitih skraćenja i online uslova, također kombiniramo i vektor riječi na nivou riječi i karaktera koji se uključuje da bi bolje rješavali riječi koje se ne pojavljuju u rečniku. Naš jedini model1 postigao je 29,50% makro F-rezultata u testovima i redovima 9. između 48 tima.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittelee SemEval 2018 Task 2: Emoji Ennuste -osion yhden mallin englanniksi. Jotta voidaan ennustaa tweetin sisältämiä emojia, perusmalli on huomiopohjainen toistuva hermoverkko, joka on saavuttanut tyydyttävän suorituskyvyn luonnollisen kielen prosessoinnissa. Koska teksti tulee sosiaalisesta mediasta, se sisältää monia ristiriitaisia lyhenteitä ja online-termejä, yhdistämme myös sanaston sanaston sisältämien sanojen sanatason ja merkkitason sanavektoriupotuksen. Yksittäinen malli1 saavutti testidatassa 29,50 prosentin makroF-pisteen ja sijoittui yhdeksänneksi 48 tiimin joukossa.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis tutvustatakse SemEval 2018 ülesande 2. ülesande 1. alamülesande mudelit: emojiprognoos inglise keeles. Selleks, et ennustada emojisid, mis võivad sisalduda säutsu, on põhimudel, mida me kasutame, tähelepanupõhine korduv närvivõrk, mis on saavutanud rahuldavad tulemused looduskeele töötlemisel. Arvestades, et tekst pärineb sotsiaalmeediast, sisaldab see palju erinevaid lühendeid ja online-termineid, kombineerime ka sõnatasemel ja märgitasemel sõnade vektori manustamise, et paremini käsitleda sõnavaras puuduvaid sõnu. Meie üksikmudel1 saavutas testiandmetes 29,50% makro F-skoori ja on 48 meeskonna seas 9. kohal.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing ngendah akeh model sing tek dadi Subtask 1 of semebal 2020 task 2: emuji prediktion in Inggris. Ditoleh penting kajine melambangkuyung ing bintu, sampeyan pangan dumadhining kiye wis nguasai bintu, nik sampeyan ingkang diangkat dhéwé bookmark model1 sing wis rampun gampang 30.5% macro F-slang kanggo teka data lan warni 9 lan tambah sing 48ni karo pok.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja naš enotni model podnaloge 1 SemEval 2018 naloga 2: napoved emojev v angleščini. Za napovedovanje emojijev, ki jih lahko vsebuje tweet, je osnovni model, ki ga uporabljamo, ponavljajoče se živčno omrežje, ki temelji na pozornosti in je doseglo zadovoljivo delovanje pri obdelavi naravnega jezika. Glede na to, da besedilo prihaja iz družbenih omrežij, vsebuje veliko različnih okrajšav in spletnih izrazov, združujemo tudi vgradnjo besednih vektorjev na ravni besed in znakov za boljše ravnanje z besedami, ki se ne pojavljajo v besedišču. Naš posamezni model1 je dosegel 29,50% makro F-rezultat v testnih podatkih in se uvrstil na 9. mesto med 48 ekipami.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na gaurar da misalinmu guda zuwa Sub-Mission 1 of SemEal 2018 Tani 2: Emoji Prediction in English. Dõmin ya yi ɗabi'a ga foji wanda za'a ƙunsa da shi cikin wani Twitter, misali na'ura da mu yi amfani da shi, shi ne zan zama zanen zama zane-bakin tarakin neural wanda ya sami aikin da yarda a cikin aikin Lugha na Tsararre. Aka tunãni da littãfin ya zo daga mitanda ƙarami, yana da wasu abubuwa masu ɓarna da masu shawara, da kuma masu haɗa matsayin-daraja da maganar-daraja wanda ke ƙara zuwa mafi kyau ga gyarawa da kalmõmi wanda ba su fito cikin maganar. BittayinMu ya kai 29.50% Macro F-score cikin jarrabar data kuma ya ɗaukaka 9 daga ƙungiyõyi 48.", 'he': "העבודה הזו מציגה את הדוגמא היחידה שלנו לתת משימה 1 של SemEval 2018 משימה 2: Prediction Emoji באנגלית. כדי לחזות את האמוג'י שאולי נמצא בתוך טוויט, המודל הבסיסי שאנחנו משתמשים בו הוא רשת עצבית מבוססת על תשומת לב שמגיעה ביצועים מרוצים בעבודת שפת טבעית. בהתחשב בטקסט מגיע ממדיה חברתית, הוא מכיל הרבה קיצורים שונים ומונחים באינטרנט, אנחנו גם משלבים רמת מילים וקטור מילים רמת אופי המודל היחיד1 שלנו השיג 29.50% נקודת מקרו-F בנתונים מבחן ומדרגות 9 בין 48 קבוצות.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཅིག་པུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལྡན་གྱི་རྩོམ་པ་༡(SemEval)2018 ལས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་༢：Emoji Prediction in English ང་ཚོའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་emoji གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི། Considering the text comes from social media, it contains many discrepant abbreviations and online terms, we also combine word-level and character-level word vector embedding to better handling the words not appear in the vocabulary. ང་ཚོའི་མིག་རྣམ་པ་གཅིག་གི་ནང་གི་ཚད་གཞི་ཚིག་དང་མཉམ་གྲངས་ཀ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Peperomia at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'ar': 'Peperomia في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: نهج قائم على تشابه المتجهات للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية', 'es': 'Peperomia en SemEval-2018 Tarea 2: enfoque basado en similitudes vectoriales para la predicción de emojis', 'pt': 'Peperomia no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Abordagem Baseada em Similaridade Vetorial para Previsão de Emoji', 'fr': 'Peperomia au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Approche basée sur la similitude vectorielle pour la prédiction des emoji', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のペペロミアタスク2 ：絵文字予測のためのベクトル類似性ベースのアプローチ', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务2上Peperomia:向量相似性之表情符号占也', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर Peperomia: इमोजी भविष्यवाणी के लिए वेक्टर समानता आधारित दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Пеперомия на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Подход на основе векторного сходства для прогнозирования эмодзи', 'ga': 'Peperomia ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Cur Chuige Bunaithe ar Chosúlacht Veicteoir do Thuar Emoji', 'el': 'Πεπεραιμία στο έργο 2: Προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε διανυσματική ομοιότητα για την πρόβλεψη Εμόζι', 'ka': 'Peperomia at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'hu': 'Peperomia a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Vektoros hasonlóság alapú megközelítés Emoji jósláshoz', 'kk': 'Пеперомия 2- шегінші-2018 тапсырмасында: Вектордың ұқсастығы Эмози бағдарламасының негізінде қатынау', 'it': 'Peperomia a SemEval-2018 Task 2: approccio basato sulla somiglianza vettoriale per la previsione Emoji', 'mk': 'Пеперомија на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Вокторски пристап базиран на сличност за предвидување на емои', 'lt': 'Peperomia at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'ms': 'Peperomia pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Pendekatan Berasas Kesamaan Vektor untuk Prediksi Emoji', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: എമോജിയുടെ നിയന്ത്രണത്തിനുള്ള വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സമമാണ് അടിസ്ഥാനം', 'mt': 'Peperomia at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'pl': 'Peperomia w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Podejście oparte na podobieństwie wektorowym do prognozowania emoji', 'no': 'Peperomia ved halvEval-2018 oppgåve 2: Vektor-likningsbasert tilgang for Emoji-forhåndsvising', 'ro': 'Peperomia la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Abordarea bazată pe similitudine vectorială pentru predicția emoji', 'sr': 'Peperomija na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 2: Vektorska sličnost na osnovu pristupa prema predviđanju emoji', 'si': 'පෙපෙරෝමියා සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 2: වෙක්ටර් සිමිලියාවට ආධාරිත එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධානය වෙනුවෙන් අවස්ථාව', 'sv': 'Peperomia på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Vektorliknande metod för Emoji Prediction', 'so': 'Peperomia at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vector Similarity Road for Prediction Emoji', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 2: எமோஜி முன்னுரிமைக்கான பெப்பரோமி', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس ۲ میں پیپیرومیا: ویکتور سیمالیاتی ایموجی پیش بینی کے لئے اوسط تقریبا', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Không sâu sắc, không sâu sắc, không sâu sắc.', 'nl': 'Peperomia bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Vector Similarity Based Approach voor Emoji Prediction', 'bg': 'Пеперомия в Задача 2: Подход, базиран на векторна прилика за прогнозиране на емоджи', 'da': 'Peperomia på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Vektor Lighedsbaseret Tilgang til Emoji Forudsigelse', 'hr': 'Peperomija na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 2: sličnost vektora temeljena na temelju pristupa predviđanja emoji', 'de': 'Peperomia bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Vector Ähnlichkeits-basierter Ansatz zur Emoji-Vorhersage', 'id': 'Peperomia di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Pendekatan Berdasarkan Simulasi Vektor untuk Prediksi Emoji', 'ko': 'SemEval-18의 Peperomia 퀘스트 2: 벡터 유사성을 바탕으로 하는 표정 예측 방법', 'fa': 'پیپرومیا در تابع ۲۰۱۸ در نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸: شبیه\u200cسازی ویکتوری بر اساس تقریبا برای پیشنهاد ایموزی', 'sw': 'Peperomia katika Task la SemEval-2018 2: Vector Similarity Based on Prediction Emoji', 'af': 'Peperomia by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Vektor Similariteit Based Approach vir Emoji voorskou', 'sq': 'Peperomia në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vektor Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'hy': 'PePeromia-ը 2018-ի կիսագնդի 2. առաջադրանքում. Վեկտորի նմանության հիմնված մոտեցում էմոյի կանխատեսման համար', 'az': 'Peperomia at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vektor Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'tr': 'Peperomia at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'am': 'ስራ 2: Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ টাস্ক ২-এ পেপারোমিয়া: এমোজি প্রেসিডেশনের জন্য ভেক্টর একই ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক পথ', 'bs': 'Peperomija na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 2: Sličnost vektora na osnovu pristupa predviđanja emoji', 'ca': 'Peperòmia a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction', 'cs': 'Peperomia na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Přístup založený na vektorové podobnosti pro předpověď emoji', 'et': 'Peperomia SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: vektori sarnasusel põhinev lähenemisviis emojide prognoosimisele', 'fi': 'Peperomia SemEval-2018 Task 2: Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Ennuste', 'jv': 'Piperomia nang seminval-2008 task 2: vector Similrity bazed Method for emuji predikion', 'sk': 'Peperomija na SemEval-2018 2. naloga: pristop na podlagi podobnosti vektorjev za napoved emojijev', 'he': 'פפרומיה ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 2: גישה מבוססת בדמיון Vector for Emoji Prediction', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'bo': 'ཚོང་འབྲས་པ་(SemEval-2018 Task 2)ནང་དུ་ཚོང་འབྲེལ་མཐུན་དང་པོ་(Vector Similarity Based Approach for Emoji Prediction)'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our participation in SemEval 2018 Task 2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction, in which participants are asked to predict a tweet’s most associated emoji from 20 emojis. Instead of regarding it as a 20-class classification problem we regard it as a text similarity problem. We propose a vector similarity based approach for this task. First the distributed representation (tweet vector) for each tweet is generated, then the similarity between this tweet vector and each emoji’s embedding is evaluated. The most similar emoji is chosen as the predicted label. Experimental results show that our approach performs comparably with the classification approach and shows its advantage in classifying emojis with similar semantic meaning.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركتنا في SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction ، حيث يُطلب من المشاركين توقع الرموز التعبيرية الأكثر ارتباطًا بالتغريدة من 20 رمزًا تعبيريًا. بدلاً من اعتبارها مشكلة تصنيف من 20 فئة ، نعتبرها مشكلة تشابه نص. نقترح نهجًا قائمًا على التشابه المتجه لهذه المهمة. أولاً ، يتم إنشاء التمثيل الموزع (ناقل التغريدات) لكل تغريدة ، ثم يتم تقييم التشابه بين متجه التغريدة هذا وتضمين كل رمز تعبيري. يتم اختيار الرموز التعبيرية الأكثر تشابهًا على أنها التسمية المتوقعة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نهجنا يؤدي بشكل مقارن مع نهج التصنيف ويظهر ميزته في تصنيف الرموز التعبيرية ذات المعنى الدلالي المماثل.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestra participación en la Tarea 2 de SemEval 2018: Predicción multilingüe de emojis, en la que se pide a los participantes que predigan los emojis más asociados de un tweet a partir de 20 emojis. En lugar de considerarlo como un problema de clasificación de 20 clases, lo consideramos como un problema de similitud de texto. Proponemos un enfoque basado en la similitud vectorial para esta tarea. Primero se genera la representación distribuida (vector de tweet) para cada tweet, luego se evalúa la similitud entre este vector de tweet y la incrustación de cada emoji. Se elige el emoji más similar como etiqueta predicha. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro enfoque funciona de manera comparable con el enfoque de clasificación y muestra su ventaja en la clasificación de emojis con un significado semántico similar.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre participation au SemEval 2018 Task 2\xa0: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, dans lequel les participants sont invités à prédire les emoji les plus associés à un tweet parmi 20 émojis. Au lieu de le considérer comme un problème de classement à 20 classes, nous le considérons comme un problème de similitude de texte. Nous proposons une approche basée sur la similarité vectorielle pour cette tâche. La représentation distribuée (vecteur de tweet) pour chaque tweet est d'abord générée, puis la similitude entre ce vecteur de tweet et l'intégration de chaque emoji est évaluée. L'émoji le plus similaire est choisi comme étiquette prédite. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre approche fonctionne de manière comparable à l'approche de classification et montre son avantage dans la classification des émojis ayant une signification sémantique similaire.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa participação na Tarefa 2 do SemEval 2018: Previsão de emojis multilíngues, na qual os participantes são solicitados a prever o emoji mais associado de um tweet de 20 emojis. Em vez de considerá-lo como um problema de classificação de 20 classes, nós o consideramos como um problema de similaridade de texto. Propomos uma abordagem baseada em similaridade vetorial para esta tarefa. Primeiro é gerada a representação distribuída (vetor de tweets) para cada tweet, depois é avaliada a similaridade entre este vetor de tweet e a incorporação de cada emoji. O emoji mais semelhante é escolhido como o rótulo previsto. Resultados experimentais mostram que nossa abordagem tem desempenho comparável com a abordagem de classificação e mostra sua vantagem em classificar emojis com significado semântico semelhante.', 'ja': '本稿では、参加者に20個の絵文字からツイートの最も関連性の高い絵文字を予測するよう依頼するSemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Predictionへの参加について説明します。20クラスの分類問題と考えるのではなく、テキストの類似性問題と考える。このタスクにベクトル類似性ベースのアプローチを提案します。まず、各ツイートの分散表現（ツイートベクトル）を生成し、このツイートベクトルと各絵文字の埋め込みの類似性を評価します。最も似た絵文字が予測ラベルとして選択されます。実験結果は、私たちのアプローチが分類アプローチと同等のパフォーマンスを発揮し、同様の意味を持つ絵文字を分類する利点を示しています。', 'zh': '本文述臣等预SemEval 2018务2:多言表情符号占,其参与者求于20表情符号中推文最关表情符号。 吾非以为20类也,以为文本相似性也。 建一向量相似性之法。 先生每推文之分布式(推文向量),然后估此推文向量与表情符号嵌之相似性。 择其最相似者表情符号以为占表。 实验结果表明者,类之性也,语义之相似者表情符号类之善者也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2018 टास्क 2: बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी में हमारी भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है, जिसमें प्रतिभागियों को 20 इमोजी से एक ट्वीट के सबसे जुड़े इमोजी की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए कहा जाता है। इसके बजाय इसे 20-वर्ग वर्गीकरण समस्या के रूप में हम इसे एक पाठ समानता समस्या के रूप में मानते हैं। हम इस कार्य के लिए एक वेक्टर समानता आधारित दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पहले प्रत्येक ट्वीट के लिए वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व (ट्वीट वेक्टर) उत्पन्न होता है, फिर इस ट्वीट वेक्टर और प्रत्येक इमोजी के एम्बेडिंग के बीच समानता का मूल्यांकन किया जाता है। सबसे समान इमोजी को अनुमानित लेबल के रूप में चुना जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण वर्गीकरण दृष्टिकोण के साथ तुलनात्मक रूप से प्रदर्शन करता है और समान शब्दार्थ अर्थ के साथ इमोजी को वर्गीकृत करने में इसका लाभ दिखाता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наше участие в задаче 2 SemEval 2018: Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи, в которой участников просят предсказать наиболее связанные эмодзи твита из 20 эмодзи. Вместо того, чтобы рассматривать его как 20-классовую проблему классификации, мы рассматриваем его как проблему подобия текста. Для этой задачи мы предлагаем подход, основанный на векторном сходстве. Сначала генерируется распределенное представление (вектор твита) для каждого твита, затем оценивается сходство между этим вектором твита и встраиванием каждого эмодзи. В качестве предсказанного ярлыка выбирается наиболее похожий эмодзи. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш подход работает сравнительно с классификационным подходом и показывает свое преимущество в классификации эмодзи с аналогичным семантическим значением.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár rannpháirtíocht i dTasc 2 SemEval 2018: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, ina n-iarrtar ar rannpháirtithe an emoji is mó a bhaineann le tweet ó 20 emojis a thuar. In ionad é a mheas mar fhadhb aicmithe 20-aicme measaimid é mar fhadhb cosúlachta téacs. Molaimid cur chuige veicteoir-bhunaithe cosúlachta don tasc seo. Ar dtús gintear an léiriú dáilte (veicteoir tweet) do gach tweet, ansin déantar an chosúlacht idir an veicteoir tweets seo agus leabú gach emoji a mheas. Roghnaítear an emoji is cosúla mar an lipéad tuartha. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfeidhmíonn ár gcur chuige inchomparáide leis an gcur chuige aicmithe agus léiríonn sé a bhuntáiste maidir le emojis a rangú le brí shéimeantach comhchosúil.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja, hogy részt vettünk a SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction programban, amelyben a résztvevőket arra kérjük, hogy jósolják meg a tweet legjobban kapcsolódó emoji-ját 20 emojiból. Ahelyett, hogy 20 osztályú osztályozási problémának tekintenénk, szöveghasonlósági problémának tekintjük. Ehhez a feladathoz egy vektorhasonlóság alapú megközelítést javasolunk. Először minden tweet elosztott ábrázolását (tweet vektor), majd értékeljük a tweet vektor és az egyes emoji beágyazása közötti hasonlóságot. A leghasonlóbb emojit választják a várható címke. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk összehasonlíthatóan teljesít az osztályozási megközelítéssel, és megmutatja előnyét a hasonló szemantikai jelentésű emojik osztályozásában.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή μας στο έργο 2: Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη στην οποία οι συμμετέχοντες καλούνται να προβλέψουν τα πιο συνδεδεμένα emoji ενός tweets από 20 emoji. Αντί να το θεωρήσουμε ως ένα πρόβλημα ταξινόμησης 20-κατηγορίας, το θεωρούμε πρόβλημα ομοιότητας κειμένου. Προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε διανυσματική ομοιότητα για αυτό το έργο. Πρώτα δημιουργείται η κατανεμημένη αναπαράσταση (διάνυσμα tweet) για κάθε tweet, στη συνέχεια αξιολογείται η ομοιότητα μεταξύ αυτού του διανύσματος tweet και της ενσωμάτωσης κάθε emoji. Το πιο παρόμοιο επιλέγεται ως προβλεπόμενη ετικέτα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας αποδίδει συγκριτικά με την προσέγγιση ταξινόμησης και δείχνει το πλεονέκτημά της στην ταξινόμηση με παρόμοια σημασιολογική σημασία.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს ჩვენი დაწყვეტილება semiEval 2018 მოქმედებაში 2: მრავალენგური Emoji წინაწყვეტილება, რომელიც დაწყვეტილებელი 20 ემოჯიდან უფრო დაკავშირებული ემოჯიდან გადაწყვეტილება 20-კლასიფიკაციის პრობლემების გარეშე, ჩვენ ამას ტექსტის სინამდვილეობის პრობლემებით ვხედავთ. ჩვენ გვაქვს გვქტორის სხვადასხვა პროგრამა ამ დავალებისთვის. პირველი გაყოფილი გამოსახულება (tweet vektor) ყოველ tweet- ის შექმნა, შემდეგ ამ tweet vektorის და ყოველ ემოჯის დაყენება განსახულება. ყველაზე მსგავსი ემოჯია მონიშნულია როგორც წინასწარმოდგინული etiket. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი პროგორმაცია კლასიფიკაციის პროგორმაციის შემდეგ გავაკეთება და ჩვენი პროგორმაცია ჩვენი წარმოდგენების კლასიფიკაციაში გამოიყენ', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūs ų dalyvavimas 2018 m. SemEval 2 užduotyje: Daugiakalbė Emoji prognozė, kurioje dalyviai raginami prognozuoti labiausiai susijusius tweeto emodžius iš 20 emodžių. Užuot ją vertinę kaip 20 klasių klasifikavimo problem ą, mes ją vertiname kaip teksto panašumo problemą. We propose a vector similarity based approach for this task.  Pirma sukuriama paskirstyta kiekvieno tweeto reprezentacija (tweet vektorius), tada vertinamas šio tweeto vektoriaus ir kiekvieno emoji įterpimo panašumas. Panašiausia emoji pasirinkta kaip numatoma etiketė. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas vyksta palyginti su klasifikavimo metodu ir rodo jo pranašumą klasifikuojant panašios semantinės reikšmės emodžius.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra partecipazione a SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, in cui ai partecipanti viene chiesto di prevedere le emoji più associate di un tweet da 20 emoji. Invece di considerarlo un problema di classificazione di 20 classi, lo consideriamo un problema di somiglianza del testo. Proponiamo un approccio basato sulla somiglianza vettoriale per questo compito. Prima viene generata la rappresentazione distribuita (vettore tweet) per ogni tweet, poi viene valutata la somiglianza tra questo vettore tweet e l'incorporazione di ogni emoji. L'emoji più simile viene scelto come etichetta prevista. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro approccio funziona in modo comparabile con l'approccio di classificazione e mostra il suo vantaggio nella classificazione di emoji con significato semantico simile.", 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашето учество во SemEval 2018 задача 2: Мултијазична предвидување на емои, во која учесниците се бара да предвидат најповрзани емои на Твитер од 20 емои. Наместо да го сметаме за проблем со класификација од 20 класи, го сметаме за проблем со сличноста на текстот. Предложуваме пристап базиран на векторска сличност за оваа задача. Прво се генерира дистрибуираната претстава (вектор на твит) за секој твит, а потоа се проценува сличноста помеѓу овој вектор на твит и вградувањето на секој емоџи. Најсличните емоџи се избираат како предвидена етикета. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот пристап функционира во споредба со пристапот на класификација и ја покажува својата предност во класификацијата на емоџии со слично семантично значење.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നത് സെമെവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: പല ഭാഷക്കാര്\u200d എമോജി പ്രിധിനിയന്ത്രണത്തില്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അവിടെ പങ് 20-ക്ലാസ് ക്ലാസ്സിലെ വിഭാഗപ്രശ്നമായി അതിനെ സംബന്ധിച്ചിടത്തോളം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് പ്രശ്നമായി കര ഈ ജോലിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രാദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം വിതരണ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d (ട്വീറ്റ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d) ഓരോ ട്വീറ്റിലും ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. പിന്നീട് ഈ ട്വീറ്റ് വെക്ടരും ഓരോ ഇമോ പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ലേബറ്റില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും പോലുള്ള ഇമോജി തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യം ക്ലാസിഫിക്ഷന്\u200d നടപടിയോടൊപ്പം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്ക', 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan ketertarikan kami dalam SemEval 2018 Tugas 2: Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa, di mana peserta diminta untuk meramalkan emoji yang paling berkaitan tweet dari 20 emoji. Daripada menganggapnya sebagai masalah kelas 20, kita menganggapnya sebagai masalah persamaan teks. Kami cadangkan pendekatan berdasarkan persamaan vektor untuk tugas ini. First the distributed representation (tweet vector) for each tweet is generated, then the similarity between this tweet vector and each emoji's embedding is evaluated.  Emoi yang paling serupa dipilih sebagai label yang dijangka. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita berkembang dengan pendekatan klasifikasi dan menunjukkan keuntungannya dalam klasifikasi emoji dengan makna semantik yang sama.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың жарым-жарым тапсырмасында қатысуымызды таңдайды: Көп тілдік эмози тапсырмасында, қатысушыларға 20 эмоджден қатысушылардың көпшілігін таңдау үшін сұралады. Ол 20 класс классификациялық мәселесі ретінде қатынасыз орнына, біз оны мәтін ұқсас мәселесі деп ойлаймыз. Біз бұл тапсырма үшін вектордың ұқсастығын негіздеген тәсілді ұсынамыз. Біріншіден әрбір tweet үшін таратылған кескіннің (tweet vekторы) түрі құрылады, содан кейін бұл tweet vekторы мен әрбір emoji ендіру арасындағы тең болады. Ең ұқсас эможи таңдалған белгі ретінде таңдалады. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің тәсіліміз классификациялық тәсілімен салыстырып, емоизмерді ұқсас semantic мазмұнымен классификациялау үшін өзінің артықшылығы', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-parteċipazzjoni tagħna f’SemEval 2018 Task 2: Predizzjoni Emoji Multilingwi, li fiha l-parteċipanti jintalbu jipprevedu l-emoji l-aktar assoċjati ta’ tweet minn 20 emoji. Minflok ma nqisuha bħala problem a ta’ klassifikazzjoni ta’ 20 klassi nqisuha bħala problema ta’ similarità tat-test. Aħna nipproponu approċċ ibbażat fuq is-similarità tal-vetturi għal dan il-kompitu. L-ewwel tiġi ġġenerata r-rappreżentanza distribwita (vector tat-tweet) għal kull tweet, imbagħad tiġi evalwata s-similarità bejn dan il-vector tat-tweet u l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ kull emoji. L- emoji l- aktar simili jintgħażlu bħala t- tikketta mbassra. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-approċċ tagħna jwettaq b’mod komparabbli mal-approċċ ta’ klassifikazzjoni u juri l-vantaġġ tiegħu fil-klassifikazzjoni ta’ emoji b’tifsira semantika simili.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz udział w SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, w którym uczestnicy są proszeni o przewidywanie najbardziej skojarzonych emoji tweeta z 20-ciu emoji. Zamiast traktować go jako 20-klasowy problem klasyfikacji traktujemy go jako problem podobieństwa tekstowego. Proponujemy podejście oparte na podobieństwie wektorowym do tego zadania. Najpierw generowana jest reprezentacja rozproszona (wektor tweeta) dla każdego tweeta, a następnie ocenia się podobieństwo między tym wektorem tweeta a osadzeniem każdego emoji. Najbardziej podobne emoji jest wybierane jako przewidywana etykieta. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasze podejście działa porównywalnie z podejściem klasyfikacyjnym i pokazuje swoją zaletę w klasyfikacji emoji o podobnym znaczeniu semantycznym.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie participarea noastră la SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingval Emoji Prediction, în care participanții sunt rugați să prezică cele mai asociate emoji ale unui tweet din 20 de emoji-uri. În loc să o privim ca pe o problemă de clasificare de 20 de clase, o privim ca pe o problemă de similitudine a textului. Propunem o abordare bazată pe similitudine vectorială pentru această sarcină. Mai întâi se generează reprezentarea distribuită (vectorul tweet) pentru fiecare tweet, apoi se evaluează similitudinea dintre acest vector tweet și încorporarea fiecărui emoji. Emoji-ul cel mai similar este ales ca etichetă prevăzută. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea noastră funcționează comparabil cu abordarea clasificării și arată avantajul său în clasificarea emojiurilor cu semnificație semantică similară.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2018 оны SemEval Task 2-д бидний оролцоог тайлбарлаж байна: Олон хэлний Emoji Prediction. Харин оролцогчдын 20 эмужийн хамгийн холбоотой эможийг тайлбарлах гэж хүсч байна. Үүнийг 20-р ангийнхээ хуваалтын асуудал гэж бодохын оронд бид үүнийг текст төстэй асуудал гэж үздэг. Бид энэ ажлын тулд векторын тэнцүү байдлыг суурилуулж байна. Эхлээд tweet бүрт хуваагдсан үзүүлэлт (tweet vector) үүсгэгддэг, дараа нь tweet векторын хоорондох тэнцүү байдал нь үнэлдэг. Хамгийн төстэй эмози нь таамаглалтай загвар гэж сонгогдсон. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний арга хэмжээний арга хэмжээтэй харьцуулж, эмчилгээ ижил semantic гэсэн утгатай хичээлд ашиг үзүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vårt deltakast i semiEval 2018 oppgåve 2: Multispråk Emoji- forhåndsvising, der deltakarar vert spurd om å forhåndsvisa dei mest tilknytte emoji frå 20 emoji s. I staden for å gjera det som eit 20 klassesklassifikasjonsproblem, ser vi det som eit problem med tekstlikning. Vi foreslår ein vektorsimilaritet basert tilnærming for denne oppgåva. Først er det distribuerte representasjonen (tweet- vektoren) for kvar tweet laga, og s å er det tilsvarande mellom denne tweet- vektoren og innebygginga av kvar emoji evaluert. Den mest liknande emoji er valt som den foregåande merkelappen. Eksperimentale resultat viser at tilnærminga vårt utfører sammenlignbare med klassifikasjonen og viser fordel til å klassifisera emojis med liknande semantisk mening.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u zadatku 2. iz polovice 2018. godine: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, u kojem su sudionici zamolili da predviđaju najpovezaniji emoji tweet a iz 20 emoja. Umesto da ga smatramo kao problem klasifikacije 20 klasa, smatramo ga problemom sličnosti teksta. Predlažemo pristup vektorskoj sličnosti na temelju ovog zadatka. Prvo se proizvodi raspodjeljena predstava (tweet vektor) za svaki tweet, a onda se procjenjuje sličnost između ovog tweet vektora i integracije svakog emoji. Najsličniji emoji je izabran kao predviđena etiketa. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup provodi usporedno sa klasifikacijskim pristupom i pokazuju svoju prednost u klasifikaciji emoja sa sličnim semantičkim značenjem.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සම්වේල් 2018 කාර්ය 2 වලට පැහැදිලි කරනවා: ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධානයක්, අංශකාරියෝ අංශකාරියෝ 20 වලින් ට අපි ඒක පැත්තක් වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පැත්තක් විදිහට බලන්න. අපි මේ වැඩේ වෙක්ටර් වර්ගයක් අධාරණය කරනවා. මුලින්ම විතරයි (ට්විට් වෙක්ටර්) හැම ට්විට් වෙනුවෙන් විතරයි, ඊට පස්සේ මේ ට්විට් වෙක්ටර් සහ හැම එමෝජිගේ ඇම්බෙන් හොඳම වගේ එමෝජි තෝරාගත්තා ලේබල් වලින්. පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණාත්මක විදිහට සමාන්\u200dය විදිහට සමාන්\u200dය වි', 'so': "Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran qayb-ka-qaadashada shaqada SemEval 2018 2: Qediyada Emoji luuqadaha badan, kaas oo wadajirka looga baahdaa in uu horay u sii sheego emojiga ugu wada xiran Twitteet 20 emoji s. Isku xiriirta dhibaatada fasalka 20-fasalka waxaynu u aragnaa dhibaato isku mid ah. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa wado isku mid ah oo shaqadan ku saleysan. Marka ugu horeysa qeybinta (vector-tweeteed) waxaa la sameeyaa tweeti kasta, kadibna waxaa qiimeeyaa isku mid u dhexeeya vectorkan tweetka iyo kooxaha emojiga. Isemoji ugu mid ah waxaa loo doortaa calaamada la sii sheegay. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu sameynayo si u eg qaababka fasaxa, wuxuuna tusiyaa faa'iidadeeda ku kala soocaynta emojiska oo micnaheedu isku mid tahay.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt deltagande i SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, där deltagarna uppmanas att förutsäga en tweets mest associerade emoji från 20 emojis. Istället för att betrakta det som ett 20-klassklassifikationsproblem ser vi det som ett textliknande problem. Vi föreslår ett vektorliknande tillvägagångssätt för denna uppgift. Först genereras den distribuerade representationen (tweet vektor) för varje tweet, sedan utvärderas likheten mellan denna tweet vektor och varje emojis inbäddning. Den mest liknande emoji väljs som den förutspådda etiketten. Experimentella resultat visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt presterar jämförbart med klassificeringsmetoden och visar sin fördel i att klassificera emojis med liknande semantisk betydelse.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் செம்வால் 2018 பணியில் எங்கள் பகிர்ந்தளிப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறது 2: பல மொழி எமோஜி முன்னேற்றம், அதில் பங்கீடுபவர்கள் 20 உணர்வுகளில் இர 20 வகுப்பு பிரச்சினையாக இதை பற்றி பதிலாக நாம் ஒரு உரை சமமான பிரச்சனையாக கருதுகிறோம். நாங்கள் இந்த பணிக்கு ஒரு வெக்டார் ஒப்பு முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். @ info முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட விளக்கச்சீட்டாக அதே போன்ற உணர்வு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்டது. Experimental results show that our approach performs comparably with the classification approach and shows its advantage in classifying emojis with similar semantic meaning.', 'ur': "This paper describes our participation in SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, in which participants are asked to predict a tweet's most associated emoji from 20 emojis. اس کے بارے میں 20 کلاس کلاس کلاسیک مشکل کے بدلے ہم اسے ایک ٹیکسٹ برابری مشکل کے طور پر سمجھتے ہیں. ہم اس کام کے لئے ایک ویکتور برابری کی تقریبا پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ پہلی بار ہر ٹویٹ کے لئے تقسیم کیا گیا ہے (ٹویٹ ویکتور) پھر اس ٹویٹ ویکتور اور ہر ایموجی کے اندر کی برابری کا ارزش کیا جاتا ہے. سب سے زیادہ مشابہ ایموجی کو پیش بینی لیبل کے طور پر انتخاب کیا جاتا ہے. آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ کلاسیفوں کی طریقہ سے مثالی طریقہ کے ساتھ عمل کرتی ہے اور اس کا فائدہ دکھاتا ہے کہ اس طرح کی مثالی مثالی سے emojis کو کلاسیفوں میں دکھاتا ہے.", 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval 2018 Vazifa 2: Multi-tillar Emoji Predictionary, bu xabarga bog'liq Twitterdan 20 emojisdan eng eng bog'liq emojisining hisobini predictini anglatadi. 20 darajadagi darajalik muammolari sifatida o'ylab, biz uni matn bir xil muammolari deb hisoblanamiz. We propose a vector similarity based approach for this task.  Birinchi marta qaytarilgan (Twitter vektor) tashkilotlari yaratiladi, keyin bu Twitterning vektori va har bir emoji ichida tenglashligi qiymati. Koʻrsatilgan yorliq deb belgilangan moslamalar. Tajriba natijalari ko'rsatadi, bizning fikrimiz darajalashtirish usuli bilan o'xshash bajaradi va u huddi semantik ma'nosida emojisni birlashtirish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả s ự tham gia của chúng ta trong nhiệm vụ SemEvol 2008 2: dự đoán đa ngôn ngữ của dãy núi Emoji, nơi mà người tham dự dự dự đoán biểu tượng được liên quan nhiều nhất của tweet từ 200Rs. Thay vì coi nó như một vấn đề hạng hai, chúng tôi coi nó là một vấn đề về nét chung. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp tương đồng giống nhau cho nhiệm vụ này. Đầu tiên tạo ra hình ảnh được phân phối (véc- tơ tweet) cho mỗi tweet, sau đó, s ự tương đồng giữa véc- tơ này và sự nhúng vào của mỗi biểu tượng. Loại biểu tượng tương tự nhất được chọn là nhãn được dự đoán. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta tiến triển tương đối với phương pháp phân loại và cho thấy lợi thế của nó khi phân loại những biểu tượng này với nghĩa ngữ pháp tương tự.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва участието ни в Задача 2: Многоезична прогноза за емоджи, в която участниците са помолени да предскажат най-свързаните емоджи в туит от 20 емоджи. Вместо да го разглеждаме като проблем за класификация от 20 класа, ние го разглеждаме като проблем за сходство с текста. Предлагаме подход, базиран на векторна прилика, за тази задача. Първо се генерира разпределено представяне (вектор на туит) за всеки туит, след това се оценява сходството между този вектор на туит и вграждането на всяко емоджи. Най-подобен емоджи е избран като прогнозиран етикет. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият подход се представя сравнимо с класификационния подход и показва предимството му при класифицирането на емоджи със сходно семантично значение.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u zadatku 2. iz polovice 2018. godine: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, u kojem se sudionici traže da predviđaju najpovezaniji emoji tweet a iz 20 emoji s. Umjesto da ga smatramo problem klasifikacije 20 klasa smatramo problem sličnosti teksta. Predlažemo pristup na temelju sličnosti vektora za ovaj zadatak. Prvo se proizvodi raspodjeljena predstava (tweet vektor) za svaki tweet, a onda se procjenjuje sličnost između ovog tweet vektora i ugrađenja svakog emoji. Najsličniji emoji je izabran kao predviđena etiketa. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup provodi usporedno s klasifikacijskim pristupom i pokazuju svoju prednost u klasifikaciji emojis sa sličnim semantičkim značenjem.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores deltagelse i SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, hvor deltagerne bliver bedt om at forudsige en tweets mest tilknyttede emoji fra 20 emojis. I stedet for at betragte det som et klassifikationsproblem på 20 klasser betragter vi det som et tekstligningsproblem. Vi foreslår en vektor lighed baseret tilgang til denne opgave. Først genereres den distribuerede repræsentation (tweet vektor) for hver tweet, derefter evalueres ligheden mellem denne tweet vektor og hver emojis indlejring. Den mest lignende emoji er valgt som den forudsigede etiket. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang fungerer sammenligneligt med klassifikationsmetoden og viser sin fordel ved klassificering af emojis med lignende semantisk betydning.', 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft onze deelname aan SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, waarin deelnemers worden gevraagd om de meest geassocieerde emoji van een tweet te voorspellen van 20-emoji's. In plaats van het te beschouwen als een 20-klassenclassificatieprobleem beschouwen we het als een tekstgelijkenisprobleem. Voor deze taak stellen we een op vectorovereenkomsten gebaseerde benadering voor. Eerst wordt de gedistribueerde representatie (tweetvector) voor elke tweet gegenereerd, vervolgens wordt de overeenkomst tussen deze tweetvector en de embedding van elke emoji geëvalueerd. De meest vergelijkbare emoji wordt gekozen als het voorspelde label. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak vergelijkbaar presteert met de classificatiebenadering en zijn voordeel toont bij het classificeren van emoji's met vergelijkbare semantische betekenis.", 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan parteċipasi kita di SemEval 2018 Tugas 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, di mana para peserta diminta untuk memprediksi emoji paling terkait tweet dari 20 emoji. Daripada menganggapnya sebagai masalah klasifikasi kelas 20 kita menganggapnya sebagai masalah persamaan teks. Kami mengusulkan pendekatan vektor berdasarkan persamaan untuk tugas ini. Pertama representation distribusi (vektor tweet) untuk setiap tweet dihasilkan, kemudian persamaan antara vektor tweet ini dan penerbangan setiap emoji dihasilkan. emoji yang paling mirip dipilih sebagai label yang diprediksi. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita berhasil dibandingkan dengan pendekatan klasifikasi dan menunjukkan keuntungannya dalam klasifikasi emoji dengan arti semantis yang sama.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unsere Teilnahme an SemEval 2018 Task 2: Mehrsprachige Emoji-Vorhersage, bei der Teilnehmer gebeten werden, das am häufigsten assoziierte Emoji eines Tweets von 20-Emojis vorherzusagen. Anstatt es als 20-Klassen Klassifikationsproblem zu betrachten, betrachten wir es als Textähnlichkeitsproblem. Wir schlagen einen auf Vektorähnlichkeit basierenden Ansatz für diese Aufgabe vor. Zunächst wird die verteilte Darstellung (Tweet-Vektor) für jeden Tweet generiert, dann wird die Ähnlichkeit zwischen diesem Tweet-Vektor und der Einbettung jedes Emojis bewertet. Das ähnlichste Emoji wird als vorhergesagtes Label gewählt. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Ansatz vergleichbar mit dem Klassifizierungsansatz funktioniert und seinen Vorteil bei der Klassifizierung von Emojis mit ähnlicher semantischer Bedeutung zeigt.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت ما را توصیف می\u200cکند که در عملیات ۲۰۱۸: پیشنهاد اموژی چندین زبان، در آن از مشرکان خواسته می\u200cشود که از ۲۰ emoji s بیشترین موجی\u200cهای توئیت ارتباط داشته باشند. به جای این که به عنوان یک مشکل تجارت کلاس ۲۰، آن را به عنوان مشکل شبیه\u200cسازی متن نگاه می\u200cکنیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش مشابه\u200cای برای این کار بنیاد واکتور. اول نمایش توزیع شده (ویکتور توئیت) برای هر توئیت تولید می\u200cشود، سپس شبیه بین این ویکتور توئیت و وارد کردن هر موجی ارزیابی می\u200cشود. مهمترین emoji به عنوان نقاشی پیش\u200cبینی انتخاب می\u200cشود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهد که دستور ما با دستور مختصر انجام می\u200cدهد و فایده\u200cاش را در کلاس\u200cشناسی emojis با معنی semantic مشابه نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2018 미션2: 다국어 표정 예측에 참여한 상황을 묘사하고 참가자들은 20개의 표정에서 트위터에서 가장 관련된 표정을 예측해야 한다.우리는 그것을 20가지 분류 문제로 보지 않고 텍스트의 유사성 문제로 본다.우리는 벡터의 유사성을 바탕으로 하는 방법을 제시했다.먼저 모든 추문의 분포식 표시(추문 벡터)를 생성한 다음에 이 추문 벡터와 모든 이모티콘 삽입 간의 유사성을 평가한다.가장 비슷한 이모티콘을 예측 라벨로 선택하세요.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 분류 방법의 성능과 비슷하고 의미가 비슷한 표정을 분류할 때 그 장점을 나타냈다.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons deelnimmering in SemEval 2018 Taak 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, waarin deelnimmers gevra word om 'n tweet se mees geassosieerde emoji van 20 emoji s te voorskou. In plaas van betrekking tot dit as 'n 20 klasklas klassifikasie probleem, neem ons dit as 'n teks gelykenis probleem. Ons voorstel 'n vektor gelykenis gebaseerde toegang vir hierdie taak. Eerste is die verspreiding voorstelling (tweet vektor) vir elke tweet genereer, dan is die gelykenis tussen hierdie tweet vektor en elke emoji se inbêding evalueer. Die mees gelyke emoji is gekies as die voorskoude etiket. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons toegang vergelykbaar uitvoer met die klassifikasie toegang en wys sy voordeel in klassifisering van emojies met gelykbaar semantiese betekening.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ushiriki wetu katika kazi ya SemEval 2018 2: Utawala wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji, ambapo washiriki wanaombwa kutabiri hisia za Twita zinazohusiana zaidi kutoka hisia 20 za hisia. Badala ya kuhusiana na hili kama tatizo la kutangaza darasa la 20 tunaichukulia kama tatizo la maandishi. Tunazipendekeza vector inayofanana na mbinu za kazi hii. Kwanza uwakilishi (vector ya twita) kwa kila twiti unatengenezwa, kisha sawa kati ya vector hii ya twita na kwa kila emoji inavutiwa. The most similar emoji is chosen as the predicted label.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inafanya kama ilivyo na mbinu ya usafiri na inaonyesha faida yake katika kutangaza hisia za hisia kwa maana yanayofanana.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyt 2018-nji SemEval Görevi 2: Çoklu dilli Emoji Prediksiýasynda iştirakçilerimize 20 emoji tarapyndan en gerekli emoji taýýarlanmagy sorylýar. 20-sınıf klasifikasyon meselesi hökmünde bu mesele üçin metin meňzeşlikli mesele diýip pikir edýäris. Bu görev için vektör benzeri tabanlı bir metod teklif ediyoruz. İlk olarak her tweet için dağıtılmış temsil (tweet vektörü) oluşturuldu. Sonra da bu tweet vektörünün ve her emoji içerisindeki benzeri değerlendirildir. Iň sany emoji önlenmiş etiket ýaly saýlandyr. Experimental netijeleri biziň metodumyz klasifikasyon metodyyla ýakyn şekilde çykarýar we emojitleri semantik anlamlyk bilen klasifikasynda özüniň avantajlaryny görkezýär.', 'sq': "This paper describes our participation in SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, in which participants are asked to predict a tweet's most associated emoji from 20 emojis.  Në vend që ta konsiderojmë atë si një problem klasifikimi 20-klase ne e konsiderojmë atë si një problem të ngjashmërisë teksti. We propose a vector similarity based approach for this task.  Së pari është gjeneruar përfaqësimi i shpërndarë (vektor tweet) për çdo tweet, pastaj vlerësohet ngjashmëria midis këtij vektori tweet dhe përfshirjes s ë çdo emoji. Emoji më i ngjashëm zgjidhet si etiketa e parashikuar. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja jonë funksionon në krahasim me qasjen klasifikuese dhe tregon avantazhin e saj në klasifikimin e emoxheve me kuptim semantik të ngjashëm.", 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም በሴምEval 2018 ስራ 2 ላይ ተግባራችንን ይናገራል፡፡ የተጋሪዎቹ ከ20 ኢሜጂ ጀምሮ የተገኘውን የTwitteet ኢሞጂን ለመጠየቅ ይጠይቃሉ፡፡ በ20-ደረጃ መክፈቻ ችግር በመስጠት የጽሑፍ ብጤ መሆኑን እናስባለን፡፡ ለዚህ ስራ የተመሳሰለውን የዌትር መግለጫ እናሳስባታለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የተከፈለ መልዕክት (የTwitter vector) ለሁሉም ትዊተር ተፈጠረ ከዚያም በኋላ በዚህ ትዊተር vector እና የኢሜጂ አካባቢ መካከለኛ የሚመስል ነው፡፡ ምርጫ ፈተና ፍሬዎች የዓይነታችንን ሥርዓት በተለያዩ ሥርዓት እንዲያሳየው እና የኢሜጂን ጥቅምነት በተለያየ እውቀት በማስተካከል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր մասնակցությունը 2018 թվականի "Սեմեվալ" 2-րդ հանձնարարում\' բազմալեզու էմոջայի կանխատեսումը, որտեղ մասնակիցներին խնդրում են կանխատեսել 20 էմոջայի թվիթի ամենասոցակցված էմոջայի: Instead of regarding it as a 20-class classification problem we regard it as a text similarity problem.  Մենք առաջարկում ենք այս խնդրի համար վեկտորի նմանության հիմնված մոտեցում: Սկզբում ստեղծվում է յուրաքանչյուր թվիթի համար բաշխված ներկայացուցիչ (թվիթի վեկտոր), հետո գնահատվում է այս թվիթի վեկտորի և յուրաքանչյուր էմոջի ներառման նմանությունը: Ամենանման էմոջինները ընտրվում են որպես կանխատեսված պիտակ: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը կատարվում է համեմատաբար դասակարգման մոտեցումների հետ և ցույց է տալիս իր առավելությունը նման սեմանտիկ իմաստով էմոջայի դասակարգման մեջ:', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval Task 2-də bizim işimizi təsdiqləyir: çoxlu dil Emoji Prediction, içində iştirakçıların 20 emoji'dən tweet'in ən çox bağlı emoji təsdiqlənməsini soruşurlar. Bunu 20-sınıf klasifikasiya problemi olaraq düşündüyümüz yerinə, onu mətn oxuması problemi kimi hesab edirik. Biz bu işlər üçün vektör similarlığı təklif edirik. Əvvəlcə hər twet üçün dağıtılmış göstəricisi (tweet vektörü) yaradılır, sonra bu tweet vektörünün və hər emoji içərisində olanların bənzəri değerlənir. Ən bənzər emoji tədbir etiketi olaraq seçildi. Eksperiment sonuçları bizim tərzimiz klasifikasiya tərzimlə bərabər olaraq işlədiyimizi göstərir və bənzər semantik anlama ilə emoji klasifikasiya yaratdığımızı göstərir.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা সেমভাল ২০১৮ কাজে আমাদের অংশগ্রহণের ব্যাখ্যা করছে: মাল্টিভাষার ইমোজি প্রেশন, যেখানে অংশগ্রহণকারীদেরকে ২০ ইমোজির থেকে সবচেয়ে সং এর পরিবর্তে ২০-ক্লাসের শ্রেণীবিভাগের সমস্যা হিসেবে আমরা এটিকে টেক্সটের একই সমস্যা হিসেবে বিবেচনা করি। আমরা এই কাজের জন্য একটি ভেক্টর একই ধরনের উপায় প্রস্তাব করি। প্রথমে প্রত্যেক টুইটের জন্য বিতরণ করা প্রতিনিধিত্ব (টুইট ভেক্টর) তৈরি করা হয়, তারপর এই টুইট ভেক্টর এবং প্রত্যেক ইমোজির বিভিন্ন প্রতিটি প্ প্রাক্তন লেবেল হিসেবে সবচেয়ে অনুরূপ ইমোজি নির্বাচিত হয়েছে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা শ্রেণীবিভাগের সাথে তুলনা করে এবং একই ধরনের সামান্য মানে ইমোজিকে বিভাগ করা', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la nostra participació en SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, en la qual els participants se'ls demana predir els emoji més associats d'un tweet de 20 emoji. En lloc de considerar-ho com un problem a de classificació de 20 classes el considerem un problema de similitud de text. Proposem un enfocament basat en la similitud dels vectors per a aquesta tasca. Primer es genera la representació distribuida (vector de tweet) per cada tweet, després s'evalua la similitud entre aquest vector de tweet i l'incorporació de cada emoji. L'emoji més similar es tria com l'etiqueta predita. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre enfocament funciona comparablement amb l'enfocament de classificació i mostra el seu avantatge en classificar emoji amb sentit semàntic similar.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje naši účast na SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, ve kterém jsou účastníci požádáni, aby předpověděli nejpřidruženější emoji tweetu z 20 emoji. Místo toho, abychom na něj pohlíželi jako na 20-třídní klasifikační problém, považujeme ho za problém podobnosti textu. Pro tento úkol navrhujeme přístup založený na vektorové podobnosti. Nejprve je generována distribuovaná reprezentace (tweetový vektor) pro každý tweet, poté je vyhodnocena podobnost mezi tímto tweetovým vektorem a vložením každého emoji. Nejpodobnější emoji je vybrán jako předpovědný štítek. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš přístup funguje srovnatelně s klasifikačním přístupem a ukazuje svou výhodu při klasifikaci emoji s podobným sémantickým významem.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie osalemist SemEval 2018 ülesandes 2: mitmekeelne emoji prognoos, kus osalejatel palutakse ennustada säutsu kõige rohkem seotud emojid 20 emojist. Selle asemel, et käsitleda seda 20-klassi klassifitseerimisprobleemina, peame seda teksti sarnasuse probleemiks. Pakume selle ülesande jaoks välja vektorite sarnasusel põhineva lähenemisviisi. Kõigepealt genereeritakse iga säutsu jaoks jaotatud esindus (säutsu vektor), seejärel hinnatakse selle säutsu vektori ja iga emoji manustamise sarnasust. Kõige sarnasem emoji valitakse prognoositavaks sildiks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemine toimib võrreldavalt klassifitseerimislähenemisega ja näitab oma eelist sarnase semantilise tähendusega emojide klassifitseerimisel.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u zadatku 2. iz polovice 2018. godine: Multilingual Emoji Prediction, u kojem su sudionici zamolili da predviđaju najpovezaniji emoji tweet a iz 20 emoji s. Umjesto da ga smatramo problem klasifikacije 20 klasa, smatramo to problemom sličnosti teksta. Predlažemo pristup na temelju sličnosti vektora za ovaj zadatak. Prvo se proizvodi raspodjelena predstava (tweet vektor) za svaki tweet, a onda se procjenjuje sličnost između ovog tweet vektora i ugrađenja svakog emoji. Najsličniji emoji je izabran kao predviđena etiketa. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup provodi usporedno sa klasifikacijskim pristupom i pokazuju svoju prednost u klasifikaciji emojis sa sličnim semantičkim značenjem.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan osallistumistamme SemEval 2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction -ohjelmaan, jossa osallistujia pyydetään ennustamaan tweetin eniten liittyvät emojit 20 emojistä. Sen sijaan, että pitäisimme sitä 20 luokan luokitusongelmana, pidämme sitä tekstin samankaltaisuusongelmana. Ehdotamme vektorien samankaltaisuuteen perustuvaa lähestymistapaa tähän tehtävään. Ensin luodaan kunkin tweetin hajautettu esitys (tweet-vektori), sitten arvioidaan tämän tweet-vektorin ja kunkin emojin upotuksen samankaltaisuus. Samankaltainen emoji valitaan ennustettuun etikettiin. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme toimii vertailukelpoisesti luokittelumenetelmän kanssa ja osoittaa etunsa luokittelussa emojit, joilla on samanlainen semanttinen merkitys.', 'jv': "Awakdhéwé punika dipulungé awakdhéwé ning acara seminval 2020 Job 2: Multilanguage emuji prediktion, supoyo nggawe sapa-sapa sing dipulungé awakdhéwé éntukno sistem sing nyimpen dhéwé. Ngawe hili mbok buwis seneng pisan kelas telu kesempatan gambar, kita ngupakan seneng kyutamong kudu kelas telu sanes seng. We proposal a vector Simlaritybasic method for this task. First the Distributed representation (Tuet vector) for every tuet is generated, and the Simlarity amongst this Tuet vector and every emuji's embedding is assertive. The first is the Emaji sing dibutuhke sing dibutuhke duwé ning etiket sing apik Rejugulani sing paling nggambar kelas kuwi dianggap punika tentang karo diungubah winih sing gawe nguasai winih dhéwé kuwi tindakan sematik yo koyo ngono perusahaan seneng sampeyan.", 'he': "העיתון הזה מתאר את השתתפות שלנו בסימוול 2018 משימה 2: Prediction Emoji Multilingual, שבה משתתפים מבקשים לחזות את האמוג'י הכי מחובר לטוויט מ-20 Emoji. במקום להתייחס לזה כמו בעיה מסווג של 20 מעלות אנחנו מחשיבים לזה כמו בעיה דומה לטקסט. אנו מציעים גישה מבוססת על דמיון ווקטור למשימה זו. קודם ניוצר ייצוג המפוזר (ווקטור טוויט) עבור כל טוויט, ואז הערכה של הדמיון בין ווקטור טוויט זה לבין הערבות של כל emoji. האמוג'י הכי דומה נבחר כתווית צפויה. Experimental results show that our approach performs comparably with the classification approach and shows its advantage in classifying emojis with similar semantic meaning.", 'ha': "Bu takardan na bayyana ushinanmu a cikin aikin Semeval 2018 2: Prediction na Lugha Multura Emoji, a cikinsa na tambayi mushiriki dõmin a yi bayani ga hisia'in da ke mafi haɗuwa da shi daga 20 emjis. Babu zartar da shi kamar wata fitina cikin daraja 20 Munã buɗa wata hanya da ke daidaita zuwa wannan aikin. @ info: whatsthis The most similar emoji is chosen as the predicted label.  Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa hanyarmu na sami da hanyarwa na sifikaci kuma ya nuna amfani da shi ga fassar mutane da ma'anar kwamfyuta.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naše sodelovanje v nalogi 2 SemEval 2018: Večjezična napoved emojijev, v kateri so udeleženci pozvani, da napovejo najbolj povezane emojije tweeta iz 20 emojijev. Namesto da bi ga obravnavali kot 20-razredni problem klasifikacije, ga obravnavamo kot problem podobnosti besedila. Za to nalogo predlagamo pristop, ki temelji na podobnosti vektorjev. Najprej se ustvari porazdeljena predstavitev (vektor tvita) za vsak tvit, nato pa se oceni podobnost med tem vektorjem tvita in vdelavo vsakega emojija. Najbolj podoben emoji je izbran kot predvidena oznaka. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je naš pristop primerljiv s klasifikacijskim pristopom in kažejo njegovo prednost pri klasifikaciji emojijev s podobnim semantičnim pomenom.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་༢༠་ཅན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚབ་ལྟར་དབྱེ་བ་རིམ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་༢༠་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དཀའ་ ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་འདིའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་མཉམ་དང་མཉམ་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དང་པོར་བརྗེད་ཐེངས་རེ་རེ་བོའི་གསལ་བཤད་པ(tweet vector)དང་ཐེངས་རེ་རེར་བཞིན་ཡོད། སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཤོག་བྱང་ཞིག་འདེམས་པ Experimental Results show that our approach performs comparatively with the classification approach and shows its advantage in classifying emojis with similar semantic meaning.'}
{'en': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Predicting Emojis using RNNs with Context-aware Attention', 'ar': 'NTUA-SLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية باستخدام RNNs مع الانتباه الواعي للسياق', 'es': 'NTUA-SLP en la Tarea 2 de SemEval-2018: Predecir emojis mediante RNN con atención sensible al contexto', 'pt': 'NTUA-SLP no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Prevendo Emojis usando RNNs com Atenção ao Contexto', 'fr': "NTUA-SLP au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Prédire les émojis à l'aide des RNN avec une attention sensible au contexte", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク2のNTUA - SLP ：文脈認識アテンションを使用したRNNを使用した絵文字の予測', 'zh': 'NTUA-SLP在SemEval-2018务2:用上下文知RNN占表情符号', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर NTUA-SLP: संदर्भ-जागरूक ध्यान के साथ RNNs का उपयोग करके Emojis की भविष्यवाणी करना', 'ru': 'NTUA-SLP на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Прогнозирование эмодзи с использованием RNN с учетом контекста', 'ga': 'NTUA-SLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Emojis a thuar ag baint úsáide as RNNanna le Aird ar an gComhthéacs', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: Πρόβλεψη με χρήση προσοχής με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος', 'hu': 'NTUA-SLP a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Az emojik RNN-ek használatával történő előrejelzése kontextustudatos figyelemmel', 'it': 'NTUA-SLP a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Prevedere le emoji utilizzando RNN con attenzione contestuale', 'kk': 'NTUA', 'lt': 'NTUA-SLP 2010–2018 m. pusėje 2 užduotis: Emojis prognozuoti naudojant RNR, atsižvelgiant į aplinkybes', 'mk': 'NTUA-SLP на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Предвидување на Емојис користејќи РНН со внимание свесно за контекст', 'ms': 'NTUA-SLP pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Prediksi Emojis menggunakan RNN dengan Perhatian-Sedia-Konteks', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2-ല്\u200d എന്\u200dടുയ എസ്എല്\u200dപി: എക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dസ്- അറിയുന്ന ശ്രദ്ധ കൊണ്ട് എമോയിസിനെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് എ', 'mt': 'NTUA-SLP f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 2: Tbassir ta’ Emojis bl-użu ta’ RNNs b’Attenzjoni Konxja mill-Kuntest', 'mn': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis using RNN with Context-aware Attention', 'ro': 'NTUA-SLP la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Predicția emoțiilor folosind RNN-uri cu atenție conștientă de context', 'pl': 'NTUA-SLP w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Przewidywanie emoji przy użyciu RNN z uwagą kontekstową', 'si': 'Comment', 'sr': 'NTUA-SLP na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Predviđanje emozija koristeći RNN sa pozornošću konteksta', 'so': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Predicting Emojis using RNNs with Context-aware Attention', 'no': 'Comment', 'sv': 'NTUA-SLP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Att förutsäga emojis med hjälp av RNN med kontextmedveten uppmärksamhet', 'ur': 'NTUA-SLP نصف Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۲ میں: اپنا ایموزی پیش بینی کرتا ہے کہ کنٹکسٹ-آگاہ کے ساتھ RNN کے استعمال کرتا ہے', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 2- ல் NTUA- SLP: முன்னிலைப்படுத்தி எமோஜிஸ் RNs பயன்படுத்தி சூழல் எச்சரிக்கையுடன் கவனிப்பு', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Định trước Emojis dùng RNN với Ý Cảnh Đặt', 'hr': 'NTUA-SLP na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Predviđanje emocija koristeći RNN s pozornošću konteksta', 'da': "NTUA-SLP på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Forudsigelse af emojis ved hjælp af RNN'er med kontekstbevidst opmærksomhed", 'nl': "NTUA-SLP bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Emoji voorspellen met behulp van RNN's met contextbewuste aandacht", 'bg': 'Задача 2: Прогнозиране на емоджи с използване на РНН с внимание, съобразено с контекста', 'id': 'NTUA-SLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Prediksi Emojis menggunakan RNN dengan perhatian yang menyadari konteks', 'de': 'NTUA-SLP bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Emojis mithilfe von RNNs mit kontextbewusster Aufmerksamkeit vorhersagen', 'ko': 'NTUA-SLP가SemEval-18에서의 퀘스트 2: RNN으로 표정 예측 및 상하문 주의', 'fa': 'NTUA', 'sw': 'NTUA-SLP kwenye SemEval-2018 Task 2: Kupendekeza Emoji kwa kutumia RNNS kwa ajili ya hadhira ya Context-aware', 'sq': 'NTUA-SLP në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Predicting Emojis using RNN with Context-aware Attention', 'tr': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emojis using RNNs with Context-aware Attention', 'af': 'NTUA-SLP by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Voorskou Emojies gebruik RNN met Konteks-waarskuwing', 'az': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Context-aware Attention il…Щ RNN kullanan Emojil…Щr t…Щmin edir', 'bs': 'NTUA-SLP na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Predviđanje emocija koristeći RNN sa pozornošću konteksta', 'am': 'ስራ 2: Predicting Emojis using RNs with Context-aware Attention', 'hy': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Predicting Emojis using RNNs with Context-aware Attention', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২-এ এনটুএ-এসএলপি: এমোজিদের ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন পর্যবেক্ষণের সাথে এনএনএনএন ব্যবহার করছে', 'ca': 'NTUA-SLP a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Predicting Emojis using RNN with Context-aware Attention', 'cs': 'NTUA-SLP na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Předvídání emoji pomocí RNN s kontextovou pozorností', 'et': 'NTUA-SLP SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: emojide prognoosimine RNN-de abil kontekstiteadliku tähelepanuga', 'fi': 'NTUA-SLP SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Emojien ennustaminen RNN:ien avulla kontekstitietoisella huomiolla', 'jv': 'For Word Wrap Around', 'sk': 'NTUA-SLP na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: Napovedovanje emojisov z uporabo RNN-jev s pozornostjo, ki se zaveda konteksta', 'he': 'NTUA-SLP ב SemEval-2018 משימה 2: Predicting Emojis using RNN with Context-aware Attention', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'NTUA-SLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Predicting Emojis using RNNs with Context-aware Attention'}
{'en': 'In this paper we present a deep-learning model that competed at SemEval-2018 Task 2 Multilingual Emoji Prediction. We participated in subtask A, in which we are called to predict the most likely associated emoji in English tweets. The proposed architecture relies on a Long Short-Term Memory network, augmented with an attention mechanism, that conditions the weight of each word, on a context vector which is taken as the aggregation of a tweet’s meaning. Moreover, we initialize the embedding layer of our model, with word2vec word embeddings, pretrained on a dataset of 550 million English tweets. Finally, our model does not rely on hand-crafted features or lexicons and is trained end-to-end with back-propagation. We ranked 2nd out of 48 teams.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نموذج التعلم العميق الذي تنافس في SemEval-2018 Task 2 "Multilingual Emoji Prediction". شاركنا في المهمة الفرعية أ ، والتي تم استدعاؤنا فيها للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية الأكثر ارتباطًا في التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية. تعتمد البنية المقترحة على شبكة ذاكرة طويلة المدى ، معززة بآلية الانتباه ، والتي تحدد وزن كل كلمة ، على "متجه السياق" الذي يعتبر بمثابة تجميع لمعنى تغريدة. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بتهيئة طبقة التضمين في نموذجنا ، مع تضمين كلمة word2vec ، تم اختبارها مسبقًا على مجموعة بيانات من 550 مليون تغريدة باللغة الإنجليزية. أخيرًا ، لا يعتمد نموذجنا على ميزات أو معاجم مصنوعة يدويًا ويتم تدريبه من البداية إلى النهاية باستخدام التكاثر الخلفي. حصلنا على المركز الثاني من أصل 48 فريقًا.', 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos un modelo de aprendizaje profundo que compitió en la Tarea 2 de SemEval-2018 «Predicción multilingüe de emojis». Participamos en la subtarea A, en la que se nos llama a predecir el emoji más probable asociado en los tuits en inglés. La arquitectura propuesta se basa en una red de memoria a corto plazo a largo plazo, aumentada con un mecanismo de atención, que condiciona el peso de cada palabra, en un «vector de contexto» que se toma como la agregación del significado de un tweet. Además, inicializamos la capa de incrustación de nuestro modelo, con incrustaciones de palabras word2vec, preentrenadas en un conjunto de datos de 550 millones de tuits en inglés. Por último, nuestro modelo no se basa en funciones o lexicones hechos a mano y está entrenado de principio a fin con retropropagación. Clasificamos el segundo lugar de 48 equipos.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons un modèle d'apprentissage profond qui a participé à la tâche 2 de SEMEVAL-2018 «\xa0Prédiction multilingue des emoji\xa0». Nous avons participé à la sous-tâche A, dans laquelle nous sommes appelés à prédire les emoji les plus susceptibles d'être associés dans les tweets en anglais. L'architecture proposée repose sur un réseau de mémoire à long terme, augmenté d'un mécanisme d'attention, qui conditionne le poids de chaque mot, sur un «\xa0vecteur de contexte\xa0» qui est considéré comme l'agrégation de la signification d'un tweet. De plus, nous initialisons la couche d'intégration de notre modèle, avec des intégrations de mots word2vec, préentraînées sur un ensemble de données de 550 millions de tweets en anglais. Enfin, notre modèle ne repose pas sur des fonctionnalités ou des lexiques fabriqués à la main et est entraîné de bout en bout avec rétropropagation. Nous nous sommes classés 2e sur 48 équipes.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo apresentamos um modelo de aprendizado profundo que competiu no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2 “Previsão de Emojis Multilíngue”. Participamos da subtarefa A, na qual somos chamados a prever o emoji associado mais provável em tweets em inglês. A arquitectura proposta assenta numa rede de Long Short-Term Memory, acrescida de um mecanismo de atenção, que condiciona o peso de cada palavra, num “vetor de contexto” que é entendido como a agregação do significado de um tweet. Além disso, inicializamos a camada de incorporação de nosso modelo, com incorporação de palavras word2vec, pré-treinadas em um conjunto de dados de 550 milhões de tweets em inglês. Por fim, nosso modelo não depende de recursos ou léxicos artesanais e é treinado de ponta a ponta com retropropagação. Ficamos em 2º lugar entre 48 equipes.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018 Task 2「Multilingual Emoji Prediction」で競合したディープラーニングモデルを紹介する。私たちはサブタスクAに参加し、英語のツイートで最も可能性の高い関連する絵文字を予測するよう呼びかけられました。提案されたアーキテクチャは、各単語の重みを、ツイートの意味の集約とみなされる「コンテキストベクトル」に基づいて条件付ける、注意メカニズムで拡張された長期短期メモリネットワークに依存する。さらに、5億5千万の英語のツイートのデータセットで事前に訓練されたword 2 vecワード埋め込みを使用して、モデルの埋め込みレイヤーを初期化します。最後に、私たちのモデルは手作りの機能や辞書に依存せず、バックプロパゲーションでエンドツーエンドで訓練されています。48チーム中2位となった。', 'zh': '于本文中,深为模样,当于SemEval-2018务2"多言表情符号占"中争之。 吾与子职A,其中求占候英语推文最可关表情符号。 所陈架构赖一长短期记网络,宜网络增注意机,宜在"上下文向量"上调单词权重,当向量为推文义之合。 用word2vec词嵌初始化模形者嵌层,当嵌5.5亿条英语推文数集上预习之。 其终不依于工词典,而反教于端到端。 在48支球队中第二。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम एक गहरी सीखने का मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो SemEval-2018 टास्क 2 "बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी" में प्रतिस्पर्धा करता है। हमने सबटास्क ए में भाग लिया, जिसमें हमें अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में सबसे संभावित संबद्ध इमोजी की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए बुलाया जाता है। प्रस्तावित आर्किटेक्चर एक दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक मेमोरी नेटवर्क पर निर्भर करता है, जो एक ध्यान तंत्र के साथ संवर्धित होता है, जो प्रत्येक शब्द के वजन को "संदर्भ वेक्टर" पर रखता है जिसे ट्वीट के अर्थ के एकत्रीकरण के रूप में लिया जाता है। इसके अलावा, हम अपने मॉडल की एम्बेडिंग परत को शुरू करते हैं, word2vec शब्द एम्बेडिंग के साथ, 550 मिलियन अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स के डेटासेट पर पूर्वनिर्धारित। अंत में, हमारा मॉडल हाथ से तैयार की गई सुविधाओं या शब्दकोशों पर भरोसा नहीं करता है और बैक-प्रोपेगेशन के साथ एंड-टू-एंड प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। हम 48 टीमों में से दूसरे स्थान पर हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем модель глубокого обучения, которая конкурировала на SemEval-2018 Task 2 «Multilingual Emoji Prediction». Мы участвовали в подзадаче А, в которой мы призваны предсказывать наиболее вероятные связанные эмодзи в английских твитах. Предлагаемая архитектура основана на сети долгосрочной краткосрочной памяти, дополненной механизмом внимания, который обуславливает вес каждого слова, на «векторе контекста», который принимается как агрегация значения твита. Более того, мы инициализируем слой встраивания нашей модели, с помощью вложений слов word2vec, предварительно обученных на наборе данных из 550 миллионов английских твитов. Наконец, наша модель не опирается на функции ручной работы или лексиконы и обучена сквозному распространению. Мы заняли 2-е место из 48 команд.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid múnla domhainfhoghlama i láthair a bhí san iomaíocht ag Tasc 2 SemEval-2018 “Multilingual Emoji Prediction”. Ghlacamar páirt i bhfothasc A, inar iarrtar orainn na emoji is dóichí a bhaineann le tweets Béarla a thuar. Tá an ailtireacht atá beartaithe ag brath ar líonra Cuimhne Fadtéarmach Gearrthéarmach, arna mhéadú le meicníocht aird, a shocraíonn meáchan gach focal, ar “veicteoir comhthéacs” a ghlactar leis mar chomhiomlánú bhrí tweet. Ina theannta sin, cuirimid tús le ciseal leabú ár múnla, le leabaithe focal word2vec, réamhoilte ar thacar sonraí de 550 milliún tweets Béarla. Mar fhocal scoir, níl ár múnla ag brath ar ghnéithe lámhdhéanta nó ar fhoclóirí agus tá sé oilte ó cheann ceann le hiomadú cúil. Bhuamar sa 2ú háit as 48 foireann.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მივიღეთ ძალიან სწავლებელი მოდელი, რომელიც semiEval-2018 დავაკეთებულია მეორე რაოდენტში "მრავალენგური ემოჯია წინაწყება". ჩვენ A-ს სტკითხვაში დავწყებდით, რომელიც ჩვენ დავწყებულიან, რომ უფრო შესაძლებელია დავწყებული ემოჯია ინგლისური tweets-ში. პროგრამეტრებული არქტიქტიკური იყოს ძალიან კონტექსტური მეხსიერების ქსელზე, რომელიც აღმოქმენტირებული მექანემისთვის, რომელიც ყველა სიტყვის სიმაღლე, რომელიც \'კონტექსტური გვეკტორისთვის შემდეგ ჩვენ მოდელის შებრუნებული სიტყვების სიტყვებით, 550 მილიონის ინგლისური tweets-ის მონაცემების შებრუნებული მონაცემების შებრუნებით დავიწყებთ. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენი მოდელი არ დარწმუნდება ხელის შექმნილი ფუნქციები ან ლექქსიკონების შესახებ და დარწმუნდება დასასრულებული დასასრულებელი პროპაგრაციით ჩვენ ვიყავით მეორე ნაწილის 48-ში.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo un modello di deep-learning che ha partecipato a SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Multilingual Emoji Prediction'. Abbiamo partecipato alla sottomissione A, in cui siamo chiamati a prevedere le emoji associate più probabilmente nei tweet inglesi. L'architettura proposta si basa su una rete Long Short-Term Memory, arricchita da un meccanismo di attenzione, che condiziona il peso di ogni parola, su un 'vettore di contesto' che viene preso come aggregazione del significato di un tweet. Inoltre inizializziamo il livello di embedding del nostro modello, con embedding word2vec word, pretrained su un dataset di 550 milioni di tweet inglesi. Infine, il nostro modello non si basa su caratteristiche artigianali o lessici ed è addestrato end-to-end con back-propagation. Siamo al secondo posto su 48 squadre.", 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy mélytanulási modellt, amely a SemEval-2018 Task 2 "Multilingual Emoji Prediction" című feladaton versenyzett. Részt vettünk az "A" altfeladatban, amelyben az angol tweetekben arra hívtak fel minket, hogy megjósoljuk a legvalószínűbb emojit. A javasolt architektúra egy olyan hosszú rövid távú memória hálózatra épül, amelyet figyelemmechanizmussal bővítettek, amely minden szó súlyát feltételezi, egy "kontextusvektorra", amelyet egy tweet jelentésének összesítésének tekintenek. Ezenkívül modellünk beágyazási rétegét inicializáljuk, a word2vec szóbeágyazásokkal, amelyeket 550 millió angol tweetet tartalmazó adatkészletre előkészítünk. Végezetül, modellünk nem támaszkodik kézzel készített funkciókra vagy lexikonokra, és végponttól-végpontig képzett a back-terjesztéssel. 48 csapat közül a második helyen álltunk.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης που ανταγωνίστηκε στην εργασία 2 "Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη εμόζι". Συμμετείχαμε στη δευτερεύουσα ερώτηση Α, στην οποία καλούμαστε να προβλέψουμε τα πιο πιθανά συνδεδεμένα emoji στα αγγλικά tweets. Η προτεινόμενη αρχιτεκτονική βασίζεται σε ένα δίκτυο Μακροπρόθεσμης Μνήμης, εμπλουτισμένο με έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής, που ρυθμίζει το βάρος κάθε λέξης, σε ένα "διάνυσμα περιβάλλοντος" που λαμβάνεται ως η συγκέντρωση της έννοιας ενός tweet. Επιπλέον, αρχικοποιούμε το στρώμα ενσωμάτωσης του μοντέλου μας, με ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, προκαθορισμένο σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων 550 εκατομμυρίων Αγγλικών tweets. Τέλος, το μοντέλο μας δεν βασίζεται σε χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά ή λεξικά και εκπαιδεύεται εξ ολοκλήρου με οπίσθια διάδοση. Καταθέσαμε 2η από τις 48 ομάδες.', 'kk': "Бұл қағазда біз біздің бірнеше тілдердің көптілік эмози алдындағы 2- тапсырмасында жарықтық оқыту үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біз A суретінде қатынасыз келді. Бұл жерде ағылшынша tweets тізімдерінің ең маңызды эмоджтерді таңдау үшін қолданылады. Келтірілген архитектура ұзын қысқа уақыт жады желіне тәуелді, қысқа уақыт механизмі арқылы көтерілген, әрбір сөздің қанықтығын, tweet мәліметінің агрегациясы ретінде 'контекст векторында' деген шарттарына ауысады. Сонымен қатар, біз моделіміздің ендіру қабатты бастадық, сөздерді 2vec ендіру үшін 550 миллион ағылшын тійтіндегі деректер жиынына аударып тұрады. Соңында, біздің моделіміз қол құрылған мүмкіндіктерге не лексикандарға сенбейді. Сонымен қайта-қайта пропагацияға үйренілмейді. Біз 48 топтардан 2-ші ретінде орындалдық.", 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan model belajar dalam yang bersaing di SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Multilingual Emoji Prediction'. Kami berpartisipasi dalam subtask A, di mana kami dipanggil untuk meramalkan emoji yang paling mungkin berkaitan dalam tweet Inggeris. Arkitektur yang direncanakan bergantung pada rangkaian Memori Jarak Panjang, ditambah dengan mekanisme perhatian, yang syarat berat setiap perkataan, pada 'vektor konteks' yang dianggap sebagai agregasi makna tweet. Selain itu, kami memulakan lapisan penyembedding model kami, dengan penyembedding kata word2vec, dilatih pada set data 550 juta tweet Inggeris. Finally, our model does not rely on hand-crafted features or lexicons and is trained end-to-end with back-propagation.  Kami berturut-turut ke-2 daripada 48 pasukan.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome gilaus mokymosi model į, kuris konkuravo 2 užduotyje „Daugiakalbė emojų prognozė“. Dalyvavome A paklausime, kuriame mes raginami prognozuoti labiausiai tikėtinus susijusius emodžius anglų tweetuose. Siūloma architektūra grindžiama ilgalaikio trumpalaikio prisiminimo tinklu, papildytu dėmesio mechanizmu, kuris kiekvieno žodžio svorį s ąlygina "konteksto vektoriumi", kuris laikomas tweeto reikšmės suvestine. Be to, inicijuojame savo modelio įterpiamąjį sluoksnį, su žodžių 2vec įterpimu, iš anksto apmokytas 550 milijonų anglų tweetų duomenų rinkinyje. Galiausiai mūsų model is nesiremia rankiniu būdu sukurtomis savybėmis ar leksikonais ir yra apmokytas nuo galo iki galo su atgaline dauginimosi sistema. Mes rankavome antrą iš 48 komandų.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник претставуваме модел за длабоко учење кој се натпреваруваше на SemEval-2018 задачата 2 „Мултијазична емоџиска предвидба“. We participated in subtask A, in which we are called to predict the most likely associated emoji in English tweets.  Предложената архитектура се потпира на мрежа на долгорочна меморија, зголемена со механизам на внимание, која ја условува тежината на секој збор, на „контекстен вектор“ кој се смета за агрегација на значењето на твитот. Покрај тоа, го иницијализираме вградувачкиот слој на нашиот модел, со вградувања на зборови word2vec, претренирани на датотеки од 550 милиони англиски твитови. Најпосле, нашиот модел не се потпира на рачно направени карактеристики или лексикони и е трениран од крај до крај со задна пропагација. Се рангиравме на вториот од 48 тимови.', 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018-ല്\u200d മത്സരിച്ചുകൊണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സബ്ബ്ബസ് A-ല്\u200d പങ്കാളികളായിരുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിളിക്കപ്പെടുന്നത് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും സ The proposed architecture relies on a Long Short-Term Memory network, augmented with an attention mechanism, that conditions the weight of each word, on a 'context vector' which is taken as the aggregation of a tweet's meaning.  അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ അകത്തേക്കുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റ് തുടങ്ങുന്നു. വാര്\u200dഡ് 2വെക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന അവസാനം, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d കൈക്കൊണ്ടുള്ള വിശേഷതകളെയോ ലെക്സിക്ഷനെയോ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നില്ല, പിന്നിലേക്ക് അവസാനിക്കുന 48 ടീമില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തെ റെഞ്ച് ചെയ്തു.", 'mt': "In this paper we present a deep-learning model that competed at SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Multilingual Emoji Prediction'.  A ħna pparteċipajna fis-sottomistoqsija A, li fiha aħna msejħa nipprojbixxu l-emoji l-aktar probabbli assoċjati fit-tweets Ingliż. L-arkitettura proposta tiddependi fuq netwerk ta’ Memorja fuq medda twila ta’ żmien qasira, miżjud b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni, li jikkundizzjona l-piż ta’ kull kelma, fuq ‘vettur ta’ kuntest’ li jitqies bħala l-aggregazzjoni tat-tifsira ta’ tweet. Barra minn hekk, ninzjalizzaw is-saff ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-mudell tagħna, b’inkorporazzjoni tal-kelma word2vec, imħarrġa minn qabel fuq sett ta’ dejta ta’ 550 miljun tweet Ingliż. Fl-aħħar nett, il-mudell tagħna ma jiddependix fuq karatteristiċi jew lexicons maħduma bl-idejn u huwa mħarreġ minn tarf għal tarf bi propagazzjoni ta’ wara. Nikklassifikaw it-tieni minn 48 tim.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2018 Task 2-д өрсөлдөг гүн гүнзгий суралцах загварын загвар өгсөн. Бид А-н суудалд оролцсон. Бид Англи tweets дээр хамгийн их холбоотой эмоджийг таамаглах гэж нэрлэгддэг. Үүний санал өгсөн архитектур нь урт богино хугацааны санамжийн сүлжээнд хамааралтай, анхаарлын механизм дээр нэмэгдсэн, үг бүрийн жин нь "контекст вектор" гэсэн үг юм. Дараа нь бид загварын нэгтгэх давхарыг эхлүүлсэн. 2vec үг нэмж, 550 сая Англи хэлний tweets дээр өгөгдлийн хэлбэртэй. Эцэст нь, бидний загвар гар бүтээгдэхүүнд эсвэл лексиконууд дээр итгэдэггүй. Тэгээд буцаад дэвшүүлэхээр сургалтын төгсгөл. Бид 48 багтаас 2-р багтаасан.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm un model de învățare profundă care a concurat la SemEval-2018 Task 2 "Multilingval Emoji Prediction". Am participat la subactivitatea A, în care suntem chemați să prezicem cel mai probabil emoji asociat în tweeturile în limba engleză. Arhitectura propusă se bazează pe o rețea de memorie pe termen scurt pe termen lung, amplificată cu un mecanism de atenție, care condiționează greutatea fiecărui cuvânt, pe un "vector de context" care este considerat agregarea semnificației unui tweet. Mai mult decât atât, inițializăm stratul de încorporare al modelului nostru, cu încorporarea cuvintelor word2vec, pretrained pe un set de date de 550 milioane de tweet-uri în limba engleză. În cele din urmă, modelul nostru nu se bazează pe caracteristici sau lexicoane realizate manual și este instruit end-to-end cu back-propagare. Ne-am clasat pe locul 2 din 48 de echipe.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy model głębokiego uczenia, który konkurował podczas SemEval-2018 Task 2 "Wielojęzyczna prognoza emoji". Uczestniczyliśmy w podzadaniu A, w którym jesteśmy wezwani do przewidywania najprawdopodobniej powiązanych emoji w angielskich tweetach. Proponowana architektura opiera się na sieci długoterminowej pamięci krótkoterminowej, rozszerzonej o mechanizm uwagi, warunkujący wagę każdego słowa, na "wektorze kontekstowym", który jest traktowany jako agregacja znaczenia tweeta. Ponadto inicjalizujemy warstwę osadzania naszego modelu, z osadzeniami słowa word2vec, wstępnie przeszkolonymi na zestawie danych 550 milionów angielskich tweetów. Wreszcie, nasz model nie opiera się na ręcznie wykonanych funkcjach czy leksykonach i jest trenowany od końca do końca z propagacją wsteczną. Mieliśmy drugie miejsce z 48-tych drużyn.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo model dubokog učenja koji se takmièio na zadatku 2 "Multilingual Emoji Prediction". sudjelovali smo u podpitanju A, u kojoj se zovemo da predvidimo najverovatnije povezanije emoji na engleskim tweetima. Predložena arhitektura oslanja se na dugoročnu mrežu uspomene, povećanu s a mehanizam pažnje, da uvjeti težinu svake reči, na \'kontekstskom vektoru\', koja se uzima kao aggregacija značenja tweeta. Osim toga, inicijalizirali smo ugrađeni sloj našeg model a, sa rečenicama 2vec, uključenim na setu podataka 550 miliona engleskih tweeta. Na kraju, naš model se ne oslanja na ruke-napravljene karakteristike ili leksikone i obučen je na kraju do kraja sa zadnjem propagacijom. Pozvali smo 2 od 48 tima.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo qoraynaa model waxbarasho dheer oo iskuul ah, kaas oo iskutallaabta SemEval-2018 shaqo 2 'Heeganka luuqadaha badan ee Emoji'. Waxaannu ka qayb galnay sub-A, kaas oo looga yeedhaa inaannu sii sheegno waxa ugu macquul ah emoji ku saabsan Tweetka Ingiriiska. Buurta la soo jeeday waxay ku xiran tahay shabakadda xasuusta waqtiga dheer, kaas oo lagu kordhiyey mechanisyo attention, shuruudaha miisaanka hadal kasta, kaas oo looga qaadan yahay 'vector' oo looga dhigi karo macnaheeda Twitteet. Sidoo kale, waxaynu bilownay saqafka modellkayaga, waxaana ku qornaa qoraal 2vec ah, waxaana lagu soo bandhigay taariikhda 550 million oo twiti Ingiriis ah. Ugu dambaysta, modellkayagu ma ku xiran karaan aqoonta gacanta ama leksikada, waxaana la baran karaa dhammaadka ugu dambaysta ee dib-u-propagaysiga. Waxaannu ka qeybnay 48 koox labaad.", 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ අපි ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒක සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩේ 2 'බොහොම භාෂාවක් එමෝජි ප්\u200dරමා අපි A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම අපිට ඇමතුම් කරලා ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් වල සංවේද ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපෘතිය විද්\u200dයාපෘතියක් ලොකු කොට්ටර්ම් මතක ජාලයෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා, අවධානයක් තියෙනවා, ඒක හැම වචනයක්ම භාරය,  තවත්, අපි අපේ මොඩේලයේ ඇන්බින්ඩ් ස්ථානය පටන් ගත්තා, වචන2වෙක් වචනය ඇන්බිඩින්ග් වචනය සමග, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි මිලියන 550 ට් අන්තිමේදී, අපේ මෝඩේල් අත්තයෙන් හොයාගත්ත අත්තයෙන් හෝ ලෙක්සිකෝන්ස් වලට විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නැහැ ඒ වගේම පිට අපි කණ්ඩායම් 48 වලින් දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරමාණය කළා.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi en djupinlärningsmodell som tävlade vid SemEval-2018 Task 2 "Flerspråkig Emoji Prediction". Vi deltog i subaktivitet A, där vi kallas för att förutsäga de mest troliga associerade emoji i engelska tweets. Den föreslagna arkitekturen bygger på ett nätverk för långtidsminne, förstärkt med en uppmärksamhetsmekanism, som styr vikten av varje ord, på en "kontextvektor" som tas som samlingen av en tweets mening. Dessutom initierar vi inbäddningslaget i vår modell, med word2vec ord inbäddningar, förankrade på en dataset på 550 miljoner engelska tweets. Slutligen är vår modell inte beroende av handgjorda funktioner eller lexikon och är utbildad från början med back-propagation. Vi rankades tvåa av 48 lag.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک عمیق سیکھنے کی موڈل پیش کرتے ہیں جو نیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۲ میں جہاد کیا گیا تھا "Multilingual Emoji Prediction". ہم نے A subtask میں شامل کیا ہے، جس میں ہم کو اظہار کرنے کے لئے بلایا جاتا ہے کہ انگلیسی ٹویٹوں میں سب سے زیادہ مشترک emoji کی پیش بینی کریں۔ پیشنهاد کی معماری ایک لانگ لنگ ٹریم میموری نیٹورک پر اعتماد ہوتی ہے، جس کی توجه کی مکانیزمن سے اضافہ کی گئی ہے، جو ہر کلمہ کا وزن ہے، ایک \'کنٹنس ویکتور\' پر جو ایک ٹویٹ کا معنی جمع کرتی ہے۔ اور ہم نے اپنی مدل کے امڈینگ لائر کو آغاز کیا ہے، کلمات 2vec کلمات امڈینگ کے ساتھ، 550 میلیون انگلیسی ٹویٹ کے ڈاٹ سٹ پر پرٹرین کیا ہے۔ آخر میں، ہمارا مدل ہاتھ کے پیدا کئے ہوئے فرصت یا لکسیون پر اعتماد نہیں کرتا اور پچھلے پھیلانے کے ساتھ تمرین کئے جاتے ہیں. ہم 48 ٹیموں میں سے دوسرا درجہ تھا۔', 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் மாதிரி காண்பிக்கிறோம் அது செம்வால்-2018 செயல் 2 'பல மொழி எமோஜி முன்ன We participated in subtask A, in which we are called to predict the most likely associated emoji in English tweets.  திருத்தப்பட்ட கட்டுப்பாடு நீண்ட சிறிய நினைவகம் வலைப்பின்னல் சார்ந்துள்ளது, ஒரு கவனத்தின் முறைமையால் அது ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் நிலையின் எடை, ஒரு 'சூழல் நெக மேலும், நாம் எங்கள் மாதிரியின் உட்பொதிந்த அடுக்கை ஆரம்பிக்கிறோம், வார்த்தை 2விக் வார்த்தை உட்பொதித்து, 550 மில்லியன் ஆ இறுதியில், எங்கள் மாதிரி கையில் செய்யப்பட்ட குணங்கள் அல்லது லெக்சிக்ஸியன் மீது நம்பிக்கை இல்லை மற்றும் பின் முடிவு முட நாங்கள் 48 குழுக்களில் இருந்து இரண்டாவது.", 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi ein dyp-læringsmodell som kompeterte på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2 «Multilingual Emoji Prediction». Vi delta i subtspørjinga A, der vi vert kalla til å foregå dei mest sannsynlege tilknytte emoji i engelske tweets. Den foreslåde arkitekturen er avhengig av ein lang kortmannenettverk på minnet, augmentert med ein oppmerksmekanisme, som betyr vekten på kvar ord, på ein «kontekstvektor» som vert tatt som aggregasjonen av ein tweet- betydning. I tillegg startar vi innbyggingslaget i modellen vårt med ord2vec- innbygging, som blir brukt på eit datasett med 550 millioner engelsk tweets. Etter slutt, vårt modell vert ikkje tilbakekalla på handsamla funksjonar eller leksikon, og er trent til slutt til slutt med bakpropagasjon. Vi rangerte 2 av 48 grupper.', 'uz': 'In this paper we present a deep-learning model that competed at SemEval-2018 Task 2 \'Multilingual Emoji Prediction\'.  Biz "A" sub-vazifasiga ega bo\'lganligimiz. Bu yerda biz ingliz tilida eng eng muhimi emoji haqida bog\'liq foydalanishni anglatuvchi deb ataymiz. Aniqlanadigan arxituvlar juda qisqa xotira tarmoqga ishlatadi. Foydalanish mekanisme bilan qo\'shiladi. Bu soʻzning har bir soʻzning balandligi, Twitterning ma\'nosini birlashtirish mumkin. Ko\'rib, biz modelimizning chegarasini boshlasamiz, so\'zlar 2vek so\'zlari bilan boshlaydi, 550 millionlab ingliz tilidagi xabarlarni o\'rganamiz. Endi modelmiz qo\'llab qo\'llangan xususiyatlarni yoki leksikatlarni ishlatmaydi va qayta propaganda oxirish o\'rganadi. Biz 48 guruhdan ikkinchi tomondan o\'zgartirdik.', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình học sâu, cạnh tranh tại SemEvol-208 Task 2 "Dự đoán đa ngôn ngữ Emoji." Chúng tôi tham gia phần A, mà chúng tôi được gọi để dự đoán biểu thức tương ứng nhiều nhất trong các tweet của tiếng Anh. Kiến trúc đề xuất dựa trên một mạng lưới Ký Ức Dài Hạn, được tăng thêm với một cơ chế tập trung, điều chỉnh trọng lượng của mỗi từ, một\'véc- tơ ngữ cảnh\'được coi là tổng hợp ý nghĩa của một tweet. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi khởi động lớp ghép của mô hình này, với sự nhúng vào từ Word2Véc, trước khi xem một tập tin gồm 5450 triệu tweet tiếng Anh. Cuối cùng, mẫu không dựa vào các tính năng hay ngôn ngữ được tạo tay đôi và được đào tạo từ thiết bị cuối cùng với hậu truyền. Chúng tôi đứng thứ hai trên vài đội 48.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo model dubokog učenja koji se natječeo na zadatku 2. iz polovine Evala-2018 "Multilingual Emoji Prediction". sudjelovali smo u podpitanju A, u kojoj se zovemo predvidjeti najvjerojatnije povezanije emoji na engleskim tweetima. Predložena arhitektura oslanja se na dugoročnu mrežu uspomene, povećanu s mehanizam pažnje, te uvjete težine svake riječi, na \'kontekstski vektor\' koji se uzima kao aggregacija značenja tweet a. Osim toga, inicijalizirali smo ugrađeni sloj našeg model a, sa riječima 2vec, ugrađenim na setu podataka od 550 milijuna engleskih tweets. Na kraju, naš model se ne oslanja na svojstva ili leksikone koji su napravljeni na rukama i obučeni je kraj do kraja sa zadnjem propagacijom. Pozvali smo 2 od 48 tima.', 'da': "I denne artikel præsenterer vi en deep-learning model, der konkurrerede på SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Multilingual Emoji Prediction'. Vi deltog i underopgave A, hvor vi bliver kaldt til at forudsige de mest sandsynlige tilknyttede emoji i engelske tweets. Den foreslåede arkitektur er baseret på et Long Short-Term Memory netværk, forstærket med en opmærksomhedsmekanisme, der betinger vægten af hvert ord, på en 'kontekstvektor', der tages som samlingen af en tweets betydning. Desuden initialiserer vi indlejringslaget i vores model, med word2vec ord indlejringer, forudsat på et datasæt på 550 millioner engelske tweets. Endelig er vores model ikke afhængig af håndlavede funktioner eller leksikoner og er trænet end-to-end med back-formering. Vi rangerede 2. ud af 48 hold.", 'nl': "In dit artikel presenteren we een deep-learning model dat deelnam aan SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Meertalige Emoji Prediction'. We hebben deelgenomen aan subtaak A, waarin we geroepen worden om de meest waarschijnlijke bijbehorende emoji in Engelse tweets te voorspellen. De voorgestelde architectuur berust op een Long Short-Term Memory netwerk, aangevuld met een aandachtsmechanisme dat het gewicht van elk woord bepaalt, op een 'context vector' die wordt beschouwd als de aggregatie van de betekenis van een tweet. Bovendien initialiseren we de embedding laag van ons model, met word2vec woord embeddings, vooraf getraind op een dataset van 550 miljoen Engelse tweets. Tot slot is ons model niet afhankelijk van handgemaakte functies of lexicons en is end-to-end getraind met back-propagation. We werden 2e van 48 teams.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме модел на дълбоко обучение, който се състезава на задача 2 "Предвиждане на многоезични емоджи". Участвахме в подзадача А, в която сме призовани да предвидим най-вероятните свързани емоджи в английски туитове. Предложената архитектура разчита на мрежа за дългосрочна краткосрочна памет, допълнена с механизъм за внимание, който определя теглото на всяка дума, върху "контекстен вектор", който се приема като агрегиране на значението на туит. Освен това инициализираме вграждащия слой на нашия модел, с вграждания думи, предварително тренирани върху набор от данни от 550 милиона английски туитове. И накрая, нашият модел не разчита на ръчно изработени функции или лексикони и е обучен от край до край с обратно разпространение. На второ място сме от 48 отбора.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein Deep-Learning-Modell vor, das bei SemEval-2018 Task 2 \'Mehrsprachige Emoji-Vorhersage\' konkurrierte. Wir haben an Subtask A teilgenommen, in dem wir aufgerufen sind, die wahrscheinlichsten Emoji in englischen Tweets vorherzusagen. Die vorgeschlagene Architektur stützt sich auf ein Long Short-Term Memory Netzwerk, ergänzt um einen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, der das Gewicht jedes Wortes bedingt, auf einen "Kontextvektor", der als Aggregation der Bedeutung eines Tweets betrachtet wird. Darüber hinaus initialisieren wir die Einbettungsebene unseres Modells mit Word2vec Wort Einbettungen, die auf einem Datensatz von 550 Millionen englischen Tweets vortrainiert wurden. Schließlich verlässt sich unser Modell nicht auf handgefertigte Features oder Lexikone und wird Ende-zu-Ende mit Back-Propagation trainiert. Wir belegten den zweiten Platz von 48-Teams.', 'id': "In this paper we present a deep-learning model that competed at SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Multilingual Emoji Prediction'.  Kami berpartisipasi dalam subtask A, di mana kami disebut untuk memprediksi emoji yang paling mungkin terkait dalam tweet Inggris. Arkitektur yang diusulkan bergantung pada jaringan Memori Panjang jangka pendek, ditambah dengan mekanisme perhatian, bahwa kondisi berat setiap kata, pada 'vektor konteks' yang dianggap sebagai agregasi arti tweet. Selain itu, kami menginisialisasi lapisan embedding model kami, dengan word2vec word embedding, dilatih di dataset 550 juta tweet Inggris. Akhirnya, model kita tidak bergantung pada ciri-ciri karya tangan atau leksikon dan dilatih akhir-akhir dengan propagasi belakang. Kami memerankan kedua dari 48 tim.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما مدل یادگیری عمیق را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که در ماموریت ۲ «پیشنهاد Emoji Multilingual» مسابقه کرد. ما در زیر سوال A شرکت کردیم که در آن دعوت می\u200cشویم تا پیش بینی کنیم احتمالاً احتمالاً موجی\u200cهای ارتباط به توئیت انگلیسی است. این معماری پیشنهاد بر یک شبکه حافظه کوتاه مدت طولانی بستگی دارد، که با یک مکانیسم توجه افزایش شده است، که شرایط وزن هر کلمه، بر یک ویکتور محیط، که به عنوان جمع معنی یک تویت گرفته می شود. به علاوه، ما طبقه\u200cی وارد کردن مدل خود را شروع کردیم، با کلمه\u200cهای وارد کردن کلمه ۲vek، روی مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای ۵۵۰ میلیون تویت انگلیسی پیش گرفته\u200cایم. بالاخره، مدل ما به ویژه\u200cهای دستی یا لکسینه\u200cها اعتماد نمی\u200cکند و به پایان و پایان آموزش می\u200cشود با پشت گسترش. ما دومين از 48 تيم صحبت کرديم', 'ko': "본고에서 우리는 심도 있는 학습 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은SemEval-18 임무2인'다국어 표정 예측'에 참가했다.우리는 하위 퀘스트 A에 참여했는데 그 중에서 영어 트윗에서 가장 연관성이 있는 표정을 예측해 달라는 요청을 받았다.제시된 체계 구조는 장-단기 기억 네트워크에 의존하고 주의 메커니즘을 추가한다. 이 메커니즘은 하나의'상하문 벡터'를 통해 모든 단어의 무게를 조절하는데 이 벡터는 트위터의 의미의 집합으로 간주된다.그 밖에 우리는word2vec 단어를 삽입하여 모델의 삽입층을 초기화하고 5.5억 개의 영어 추문 데이터 집합에서 예비 훈련을 실시했다.마지막으로 우리 모델은 수공으로 만든 특징이나 어휘에 의존하지 않고 역방향 전파를 통해 끝에서 끝까지의 훈련을 한다.우리는 48개 팀 중 두 번째다.", 'sw': "Katika gazeti hili tunaweka muundo wa kujifunza kwa kina ambao ulishindana katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 “Udhibiti wa lugha nyingine wa Emoji”… Tumeshiriki katika jukumu la A, ambalo tunaitwa kutabiri uwezekano wa kuhusiana na hisia katika twiti za Kiingereza. Ujengo huo unapendekezwa hutegemea mtandao wa kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu, uliongezeka na mfumo wa kutoa maoni, hali hiyo ni uzito wa kila neno, kwenye 'vector za muktadha' ambalo linachukuliwa kama kuchaguliwa kwa maana ya twita. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaanzisha kiwango cha mfumo wetu, kwa maneno ya Word2vec, kilichowekwa kwenye seti ya taarifa za twiti milioni 550 za Kiingereza. Mwisho, modeli yetu haitegemea vipengele vya mikononi au vijana vya lexico na inafundishwa mwishoni kwa propaganda za nyuma. Tulifanya vyeo vya pili kati ya timu 48.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda semiEval-2018 Görevi 2 'Çoklu dilli Emoji Prediksiýasynda ýaryşan bir nusga görkezip otyrýarys. Biz A alt soragyna goşuldyk, iňlisçe tweetlerde en mümkin emoji täzeliklerini tahmin etmek üçin çagyrylýarys. Önerlenen arhitekturyk Uzun-zamany Hata Aýry Aýry ýagdaýynda, üns meýdançasynda ýerleşdirilýär we her s özüň a ğılygyny 'kontekst vektöre' diýip kabul edilen täwletin niýeti ýagdaýynda üýtgedir. Beýleki, nusgamyzyň içini taýýarlamak üçin 2-vek söz girişimleri bilen başladyk. 550 milyon iňlis tweets toparyna süýtgedildi. Iň soňunda, biziň modelimiz el ýazmaly hatlarymyza we leksiýalarymyza ynanmaýar we arka propagasyon bilen dowam edilýär. Biz 48 topardan ikinji sany sapar etdik.", 'sq': "Në këtë letër ne paraqesim një model mësimi të thellë që konkuroi në SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Multilingual Emoji Prediction'. Ne morëm pjesë në nënpyetjen A, në të cilën ne jemi të thirrur për të parashikuar emoxhit më të ngjarë të lidhur në tweetet angleze. Arkitektura e propozuar mbështetet në një rrjet të kujtesës afat-shkurtër, shtuar me një mekanizëm vëmendjeje, që kushton peshën e çdo fjale, në një 'vektor konteksti' që merret si agregim i kuptimit të një tweet. Përveç kësaj, ne inicializojmë shtresën e përfshirjes së modelit tonë, me përfshirje fjalësh word2vec, të parastërvitur në një grup të dhënash prej 550 milion tweets angleze. Më në fund, modeli ynë nuk mbështetet në karakteristika të ndërtuara me dorë apo lexikona dhe është i stërvitur nga fundi në fund me përhapjen mbrapa. Ne renditëm të dytin nga 48 ekipe.", 'af': 'In hierdie papier voorsien ons \'n diep-leer model wat by SemEval-2018 opdrag 2 "Multilingual Emoji Prediction" gemeenskap het. Ons het gedeel in Subask A, waarin ons geroep word om die mees waarskynlik geassosieerde emoji in Engelske tweets te voorskou. Die voorgestelde arkitektuur verlig op \'n Lang Kort Term Geheue Netwerk, vergroot met \'n aandag mekanisme, wat voorwaardes die gewig van elke woord, op \'n \'konteksvektor\' wat geneem word a s die aggregasie van \'n tweet se betekening. Ook, ons inisialiseer die inbêding laag van ons model, met woorde 2vec woord inbêding, wat op \'n datastel van 550 miljoen Engelske tweets voorgetrek is. Eindelik, ons model vertrou nie op hand-gebreekte funksies of leksikone nie en is opgelei end-to-end met terug-propagasie. Ons het tweede van 48 teams rang.', 'az': 'Bu kağıtda hal-2018 Görüş 2\'nin "Çoxlu Dil Emoji Öyrənməsi" ilə yarışmış derin öyrənmə modelini göstəririk. Biz A subtask içində iştirak etdik. İngilizce tweetlərdə ən mümkün olan emoji təxminə çağırılır. İstədiyi arhitektür uzun qısqa-s ürəkli Memory a ğzına təvəkkül edir, dikkati mehanizmasıyla artırılmış, hər sözün ağırlığını, tweetin anlamını toplayan \'kontekst vektörü\' üstündə təvəkkül edir. Daha sonra, modellərin inşa edilməsi üçün 2vec sözlərin inşa edilməsi ilə, 550 milyon İngilizə tweets verilən verilən qutusu ilə başladıq. Sonunda, modellərimiz əl yaratdığı özelliklərə və leksiklərə təvəkkül etməz və arka propagasyonla təhsil edilmişdir. Biz 48 dəstədən ikinci dəstə etdik.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም የሳምEval-2018 ስራ 2 “ብዙልቋንቋ ኢዮጂ ፕሮጀክት” የሚከራከረውን የጥልቅ ትምህርት ሞዴል እናቀርባለን፡፡ በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች ውስጥ የኢሜጂን ተቃውሞ ለመግለጥ በተጠራን አዲስ ስራ አካባቢ ተጋሪዎች ነበርን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው የመሠረተ አካውንት የረጅም ቆራጭ የቆራጭ ማስታወሻ መረብ ላይ ነው፡፡ እናም የሞዴል ደረጃን መጀመሪያ እና ቃላችን 2vec እናስገራለን፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ ሞዴላያችን በእጁ በተመነ ወይም በሊክሲክ ላይ አይደገፍም፡፡ ከ48 ቡድን ሁለተኛ ደረስን ።', 'bn': "এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষার মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি যা সেমভাল-২০১৮-এ প্রতিযোগিতা করেছিল 'বহুভাষায় ইমোজি ভাষায়। আমরা সাবটাস এ-এ অংশগ্রহণ করেছি, যেখানে আমাদের ডাকা হচ্ছে ইংরেজি টুইটে সবচেয়ে সম্ভাব্য সংশ্লিষ্ট ইমোজির কথা ভব The proposed architecture relies on a Long Short-Term Memory network, augmented with an attention mechanism, that conditions the weight of each word, on a 'context vector' which is taken as the aggregation of a tweet's meaning.  এছাড়াও, আমরা আমাদের মডেলের বিভিন্ন স্তরের শুরু করি, ওয়ার্ড২ভেক শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিতে দেখা যাচ্ছে, যা ৫৫০ মিলিয়ন ইংরেজি টু শেষ পর্যন্ত, আমাদের মডেল হাতে কাজ করা বা লেক্সিকোন বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভর করে না এবং পিছনের প্রচারণার শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রশিক্ষিত We ranked 2nd out of 48 teams.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo model dubokog učenja koji se natjecava na zadatku 2. iz polu Evala-2018 "Multilingual Emoji Prediction". sudjelovali smo u podpitanju A, u kojoj se zovemo predvidjeti najvjerojatnije povezanije emoji na engleskim tweetima. Predložena arhitektura oslanja se na dugoročnu mrežu uspomene, povećanu s a mehanizam pažnje, koja uvjetuje težinu svake riječi, na \'kontekstskog vektora\' koja se uzima kao aggregacija značenja tweeta. Osim toga, inicijalizirali smo ugrađeni sloj našeg model a, sa rečenicama 2vec, uključenim na setu podataka od 550 miliona engleskih tweets. Na kraju, naš model se ne oslanja na ruke-napravljene karakteristike ili leksikone i obučen je na kraju do kraja sa stražnjom propagacijom. Pozvali smo 2 od 48 tima.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme model hlubokého učení, který soutěžil na SemEval-2018 Task 2 \'Multilingual Emoji Prediction\'. Účastnili jsme se podúkolu A, ve kterém jsme vyzváni k předpovědi nejpravděpodobnějších souvisejících emoji v anglických tweetech. Navržená architektura se opírá o síť dlouhodobé krátkodobé paměti, rozšířenou o mechanismus pozornosti, který podmíní váhu každého slova, o "kontextový vektor", který je považován za agregaci významu tweetu. Navíc inicializujeme vkládací vrstvu našeho modelu, pomocí vložení slov Word2vec, předtrénovanou na datové sadě 550 milionů anglických tweetů. Konečně, náš model nespoléhá na ručně vytvořené funkce nebo lexikony a je trénován end-to-end s back-propagací. Z 48ti týmů jsme byli druhí.', 'ca': "In this paper we present a deep-learning model that competed at SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Multilingual Emoji Prediction'.  Vam participar en la subterrània A, en la qual ens diuen predir els emoji més probablement associats en els tweets anglesos. L'arquitectura proposada es basa en una xarxa de memòria a curt termini, augmentata amb un mecanisme d'atenció, que condiciona el pes de cada paraula, en un 'vector contextual' que es considera l'agregació del significat d'un tweet. A més, iniciem la capa d'incorporació del nostre model, amb incorporació de paraules word2vec, pré-entrenada en un conjunt de dades de 550 milions de tweets anglesos. Finalment, el nostre model no es basa en característiques o lexicòniques artificials i està entrenat de cap a cap amb propagació retroactiva. Vam classificar el segon de cada 48 equips.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame sügavõppe mudelit, mis konkureeris SemEval-2018 ülesandel 2 "Mitmekeelne emoji prognoos". Osalesime alamülesandes A, kus meid kutsutakse ennustama kõige tõenäolisemaid seotud emojisid inglise säutsudes. Kavandatud arhitektuur tugineb pikaajalise lühiajalise mälu võrgule, mida täiendatakse tähelepanumehhanismiga, mis tingib iga sõna kaalu, kontekstivektorile, mida võetakse säutsu tähenduse koondamiseks. Lisaks alustame mudeli manustamiskihti Word2vec sõna manustamisega, mis on eeltreenitud 550 miljoni inglise säutsu andmekogumile. Lõpuks, meie mudel ei tugine käsitsi valmistatud funktsioonidele ega leksikonidele ning on koolitatud otsast otsa tagasi levimisega. Me saime 48 meeskonnast teise koha.', 'fi': "Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme syväoppimisen mallin, joka kilpaili SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Multilingual Emoji Ennuste'. Osallistuimme alatehtävään A, jossa meidät kutsutaan ennustamaan todennäköisimmin liittyvät emojit englanninkielisissä tweeteissä. Ehdotettu arkkitehtuuri perustuu pitkän aikavälin muistiverkkoon, jota täydennetään huomiomekanismilla, joka säätelee jokaisen sanan painoa, kontekstivektoriin, jota pidetään tweetin merkityksen yhdistämisenä. Lisäksi alustamme mallimme upotuskerroksen word2vec-sanaupotuksilla, jotka on esiasennettu 550 miljoonan englanninkielisen twiitin aineistoon. Lopuksi, mallimme ei perustu käsin tehtyihin ominaisuuksiin tai sanastoihin ja se on koulutettu päästä päähän taaksepäin levittämällä. Olimme 2. sijalla 48 joukkueesta.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդել, որը մրցակցել է 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ-2018" 2-ի "Բազլեզու էմոյի կանխատեսումը": We participated in subtask A, in which we are called to predict the most likely associated emoji in English tweets.  The proposed architecture relies on a Long Short-Term Memory network, augmented with an attention mechanism, that conditions the weight of each word, on a \'context vector\' which is taken as the aggregation of a tweet\'s meaning.  Moreover, we initialize the embedding layer of our model, with word2vec word embeddings, pretrained on a dataset of 550 million English tweets.  Վերջապես, մեր մոդելը կախված չէ ձեռքով ստեղծված առանձնահատկություններից կամ լեքսիկոններից, և վերջին-վերջին սովորեցված է վերջնական տարածման հետ: We ranked 2nd out of 48 teams.', 'he': 'In this paper we present a deep-learning model that competed at SemEval-2018 Task 2 \'Multilingual Emoji Prediction\'.  השתתפנו בשאלה א, שבה נקראים לחזות את האמוג\'י הכי סביר שקשור לטוויטים אנגליים. הארכיטקטורה המוצעת תלויה ברשת זיכרון ארוכה לטווח קצר, מוצדפת עם מנגנון תשומת לב, שמתאים את משקל כל מילה, על "וקטור הקשר" שנלקח בתור האגרגרציה של המשמעות של טוויט. חוץ מזה, אנו מתחילים את שכבת ההכניסה של המודל שלנו, עם מילים מילותיות 2vec, מתאמנים מראש על קבוצת נתונים של 550 מיליון טוויטים אנגליים. סוף סוף, המודל שלנו לא סומך על תכונות ידיים או לקסיקונים והוא מאומן סוף-סוף עם התרבות מאחור. הדרגנו שני מתוך 48 קבוצות.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo model globokega učenja, ki je tekmoval na SemEval-2018 nalogi 2 "Večjezična napoved emojev". Sodelovali smo v podnalogi A, v kateri smo poklicani, da napovedamo najverjetnejše povezane emojije v angleških tweetih. Predlagana arhitektura temelji na mreži dolgoročnega kratkoročnega pomnilnika, dopolnjenem z mehanizmom pozornosti, ki pogojuje težo vsake besede, na "kontekstnem vektorju", ki se vzame kot združevanje pomena tweeta. Poleg tega začnemo vdelavni sloj našega modela z vdelavami besed word2vec, predtreniranimi na naboru podatkov 550 milijonov angleških tweetov. Naš model se ne zanaša na ročno izdelane funkcije ali leksikone in je usposobljen od konca do konca s širjenjem nazaj. Izmed 48 ekip smo bili na drugem mestu.', 'ha': "Ga wannan karatun, Munã gabatar da wata motsi mai da aka sanar da shi, wanda ya yi gauraya a kan aikin SemEV-2018 na 'Diyartar da Digiyon Digizo na'a' Mun yi mataimaki ga sub-aikin A, a cikinsa ana kiran mu dõmin ka yi bayani ga masu yiwuwa mafi kusa masu haɗuwa da Emji cikin littattafani na Ingiriya. An dõgara da shirin ayuka da aka buƙata, yana dõgara a kan jerin Naurar-Naurar-Lokaci Long-Long-Short, an ƙara da wani matsayin aikin muhimmanci, da muhalli masu nau'i ga kõwane maganar, a kan 'context-gaura' wanda aka yi amfani da shi kamar aggregerin ma'anar Twitter. Za koma, za'a fara cikin dufafan misalinmu, da word2viec, ko kuma za'a yi fassar a kan zance-zane ta 550 millionki na Ingiriya. Gani, misalinmu bã ya dõgara kan wasu misfealumai da hannayenmu ko kuma an sanar da shi ƙarami zuwa ƙarami da bayani. Mãsu rabi na biyu daga jama'a 48.", 'bo': "In this paper we present a deep-learning model that competed at SemEval-2018 Task 2 'Multilingual Emoji Prediction'. ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་འགྱུར་བའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཨིན་རིའི་གློག་འགོད་ཐོག་ཏུ་འགྲོ་སྐབས། The proposed architecture relies on a Long-Term Memory network, augmented with an attention mechanism, that conditions the weight of each word, on a 'context vector' which is taken a s the aggregation of a tweet's meaning. Moreover, we initialize the embedding layer of our model, with word2vec word embeddings, pretrained on a dataset of 550 million English tweets. མཐའ་མར་མ་དེ། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ནི་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལ་རྣམས་མེད་པར་གཞི་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོ་ཕྱོགས་མེད་པའི་དབུགས་ཕྱོགས་གཉིས་པ་དེ་འགྲོ་གི་ཡོད།", 'jv': 'Nang pebuk iki, nambah kita nganggo model sing apik-ingkang sampeyan ngupakan ing semebal-2020 task 2 \'Multilanguage emuji predikion\'. Ngawe iki ulih maneh lanjut cara-lanjut sampeyan seneng sampeyan. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngulinakake tarjamahan A, ning awak dhéwé nggalaksi perbudhakan karo emuji sing gagalé ning tuwit Inggris. architecture politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness user Awak dhéwé mlayu 2é sing katèké 48é.'}
{'en': 'Hatching Chick at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ar': 'تفقيس الفرخ في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات', 'es': 'Eclosión de pollito en SemeVal-2018 Tarea 2: predicción multilingüe de emoji', 'pt': 'Chocando pintinho no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Previsão de emojis multilíngues', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018で雛を孵化させるタスク2 ：多言語絵文字予測', 'fr': "Poussin d'éclosion à SemEval-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Prédiction multilingue des emoji", 'zh': '在SemEval-20182中伏鸡:多言表情符号占', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर हैचिंग चिक: बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'Вылупившийся цыпленок на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи', 'ga': 'Gáir ag Goir ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Tuar Emoji Ilteangach', 'hu': 'Hatching Chick a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: többnyelvű emoji jóslás', 'el': 'Εκχύλισμα Κοτόπουλου στο Εργασία 2: Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη Εμόζι', 'ka': 'სამუშაო-2018 დავალება 2: მრავალენგური ემოჯია წინასწორება', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілді эмози тапсырмасының жарым- 2018 тапсырмасы 2: көп тілді эмози тапсырмасы', 'it': 'Chick di cova a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'mk': 'Предлога 2: Мултијазична прогноза за емои', 'lt': '2 užduotis: daugiakalbė emojų prognozė', 'ms': 'Hatching Chick at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ml': 'Hatching Chick at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'mt': 'Tiġieġ għat-tfaqqis f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 2: Predizzjoni Emoji Multilingwi', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 2: Олон хэлний Emoji төсөөлөл', 'no': 'Hatching Chick at semiEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'pl': 'Hatching Chick w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Wielojęzyczna prognoza Emoji', 'ro': 'Puiul de clocot la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Predicția emoțiilor multilingve', 'sr': 'Mrzim Chick na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'si': 'හැචින්ග් චික් සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 2: ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධානය', 'so': 'Hatching Chick at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Prediction of Emoji luuqado badan', 'sv': 'Hatching Chick på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Flerspråkig Emoji Prediction', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 2: பல மொழி எமோயி முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۲ میں کیک ناپسند کرنا: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'uz': 'Eval- 2018 Vazifa 2: Multilingual Emoji Predictionary', 'vi': 'Gà nở tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-208 2: dự đoán đa ngôn ngữ Emoji', 'bg': 'Излепване на мацка в Задача 2: Многоезична прогноза за емоджи', 'da': 'Hatching Chick på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Flersproget Emoji Forudsigelse', 'nl': 'Hatching Chick bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Meertalige Emoji Voorspelling', 'id': 'Hatching Chick di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'hr': 'Mrzim čik na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 2: višejezička predviđanja emoji', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 부화 병아리 퀘스트 2: 다국어 표정 예측', 'de': 'Hatching Chick bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Mehrsprachige Emoji Vorhersage', 'af': 'Hatching Chick at semiEval-2018 Taak 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'fa': 'Hating Chick at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'sw': 'Kuchukua mchezo katika SemEval-2018 Kazi 2: Utawala wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji', 'sq': 'Hatching Chick në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'tr': 'Hatching Chick at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ca': 'Hatching Chick a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: বহুভাষী এমোজি প্রেমিশন', 'hy': 'Հաշվի առնելը "ՍեմԷվալ-2018"-ի 2. հանձնարարությունը. բազմալեզու էմոյի կանխատեսումը', 'bs': 'Mrzim čik na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'et': 'Hatching Chick SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: mitmekeelne emoji prognoos', 'fi': 'Hatching Chick SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Monikielinen Emoji Ennuste', 'cs': 'Úkol 2: Vícejazyčná předpověď emoji na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Vícejazyčná předpověď emoji', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'jv': 'Höhöhöhöh Kick nang semebal-2008 task 2: Multilanguage emuji predikion', 'sk': 'Izvalilna bejba na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: Večjezična napoved emojev', 'bo': 'Hatching Chick at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'he': 'משימה 2: Prediction Emoji Multilingual'}
{'en': 'As part of a SemEval 2018 shared task an attempt was made to build a system capable of predicting the occurence of a language’s most frequently used emoji in Tweets. Specifically, models for English and Spanish data were created and trained on 500.000 and 100.000 tweets respectively. In order to create these models, first a logistic regressor, a sequential LSTM, a random forest regressor and a SVM were tested. The latter was found to perform best and therefore optimized individually for both languages. During developmet f1-scores of 61 and 82 were obtained for English and Spanish data respectively, in comparison, f1-scores on the official evaluation data were 21 and 18. The significant decrease in performance during evaluation might be explained by overfitting during development and might therefore have partially be prevented by using cross-validation. Over all, emoji which occur in a very specific context such as a Christmas tree were found to be most predictable.', 'pt': 'Como parte de uma tarefa compartilhada do SemEval 2018, foi feita uma tentativa de construir um sistema capaz de prever a ocorrência dos emojis mais usados de um idioma em Tweets. Especificamente, modelos para dados em inglês e espanhol foram criados e treinados em 500.000 e 100.000 tweets, respectivamente. Para criar esses modelos, primeiramente foram testados um regressor logístico, um LSTM sequencial, um regressor de floresta aleatória e um SVM. Este último teve o melhor desempenho e, portanto, foi otimizado individualmente para ambos os idiomas. Durante o desenvolvimento, pontuações f1 de 61 e 82 foram obtidas para dados em inglês e espanhol, respectivamente, em comparação, as pontuações f1 nos dados oficiais de avaliação foram 21 e 18. A diminuição significativa no desempenho durante a avaliação pode ser explicada pelo overfitting durante o desenvolvimento e pode portanto, podem ser parcialmente evitados pelo uso de validação cruzada. No geral, os emojis que ocorrem em um contexto muito específico, como uma árvore de Natal, são os mais previsíveis.', 'ar': 'كجزء من مهمة SemEval 2018 المشتركة ، جرت محاولة لبناء نظام قادر على التنبؤ بحدوث الرموز التعبيرية الأكثر استخدامًا للغة في التغريدات. على وجه التحديد ، تم إنشاء نماذج للبيانات الإنجليزية والإسبانية وتدريبها على 500.000 و 100.000 تغريدة على التوالي. من أجل إنشاء هذه النماذج ، تم أولاً اختبار الانحدار اللوجستي ، و LSTM المتسلسل ، وانحدار الغابة العشوائي ، و SVM. تم العثور على الأخير لتقديم أفضل أداء وبالتالي تم تحسينه بشكل فردي لكلتا اللغتين. أثناء التطوير ، تم الحصول على درجات f1 من 61 و 82 للبيانات الإنجليزية والإسبانية على التوالي ، وبالمقارنة ، كانت درجات f1 على بيانات التقييم الرسمية 21 و 18. يمكن تفسير الانخفاض الكبير في الأداء أثناء التقييم من خلال التجهيز الزائد أثناء التطوير وربما لذلك تم منعها جزئيًا باستخدام التحقق المتبادل. بشكل عام ، تم العثور على الرموز التعبيرية التي تحدث في سياق محدد للغاية مثل شجرة عيد الميلاد لتكون أكثر توقعًا.', 'es': 'Como parte de una tarea compartida de SemEval 2018, se intentó crear un sistema capaz de predecir la aparición de los emojis de un idioma que se usan con más frecuencia en los Tweets. Específicamente, se crearon modelos para datos en inglés y español y se capacitaron en 500.000 y 100.000 tuits, respectivamente. Para crear estos modelos, primero se probó un regresor logístico, un LSTM secuencial, un regresor forestal aleatorio y un SVM. Se encontró que este último funciona mejor y, por lo tanto, está optimizado individualmente para ambos idiomas. Durante el desarrollo se obtuvieron puntuaciones de F1 de 61 y 82 para los datos en inglés y español respectivamente, en comparación, las puntuaciones de F1 en los datos de evaluación oficial fueron de 21 y 18. La disminución significativa del rendimiento durante la evaluación podría explicarse por el sobreajuste durante el desarrollo y, por lo tanto, podría haberse evitado parcialmente mediante el uso de la validación cruzada. En general, se descubrió que los emoji que se producen en un contexto muy específico, como un árbol de Navidad, son los más predecibles.', 'fr': "Dans le cadre d'une tâche partagée SemEval 2018, une tentative a été faite pour créer un système capable de prédire l'apparition des émojis les plus fréquemment utilisés dans une langue dans les Tweets. Plus précisément, des modèles pour les données en anglais et en espagnol ont été créés et formés sur 500 000 et 100 000 tweets respectivement. Afin de créer ces modèles, un régresseur logistique, un LSTM séquentiel, un régresseur de forêt aléatoire et un SVM ont d'abord été testés. Ce dernier s'est avéré être le plus performant et donc optimisé individuellement pour les deux langues. Au cours du développement, des scores f1 de 61 et 82 ont été obtenus pour les données en anglais et en espagnol respectivement, en comparaison, les scores F1 sur les données d'évaluation officielles étaient de 21 et 18. La diminution significative des performances au cours de l'évaluation peut s'expliquer par un surajustement au cours du développement et pourrait donc avoir été partiellement évitée par l'utilisation de la validation croisée. Dans l'ensemble, les emoji qui apparaissent dans un contexte très spécifique, tel qu'un sapin de Noël, se sont révélés les plus prévisibles.", 'ja': 'SemEval 2018の共有タスクの一環として、ツイートで最も頻繁に使用される言語の絵文字の発生を予測できるシステムを構築しようとしました。具体的には、英語とスペイン語のデータのモデルが作成され、それぞれ50万ツイートと10万ツイートでトレーニングされました。これらのモデルを作成するために、まず、ロジスティック回帰器、順次LSTM、ランダムフォレスト回帰器、およびSVMを試験した。後者は最高のパフォーマンスを発揮することが判明したため、両言語に個別に最適化された。開発時には、英語とスペイン語のデータについてそれぞれ61と82のf 1スコアが得られたが、公式評価データのf 1スコアは21と18であった。評価中のパフォーマンスの著しい低下は、開発中のオーバーフィッティングによって説明される可能性があり、したがって、クロスバリデーションを使用することによって部分的に防止される可能性があります。全体として、クリスマスツリーのような非常に特定の状況で発生する絵文字は、最も予測可能であることがわかりました。', 'hi': 'एक SemEval 2018 साझा कार्य के हिस्से के रूप में एक प्रणाली का निर्माण करने का प्रयास किया गया था जो ट्वीट्स में किसी भाषा के सबसे अधिक बार उपयोग किए जाने वाले इमोजी की घटना की भविष्यवाणी करने में सक्षम था। विशेष रूप से, अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश डेटा के लिए मॉडल क्रमशः 500.000 और 100.000 ट्वीट्स पर बनाए और प्रशिक्षित किए गए थे। इन मॉडलों को बनाने के लिए, पहले एक लॉजिस्टिक रिग्रेसर, एक अनुक्रमिक एलएसटीएम, एक यादृच्छिक वन प्रतिगमन और एक एसवीएम का परीक्षण किया गया था। उत्तरार्द्ध को सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने के लिए पाया गया था और इसलिए दोनों भाषाओं के लिए व्यक्तिगत रूप से अनुकूलित किया गया था। विकास के दौरान 61 और 82 के एफ 1-स्कोर क्रमशः अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश डेटा के लिए प्राप्त किए गए थे, तुलना में, आधिकारिक मूल्यांकन डेटा पर एफ 1-स्कोर 21 और 18 थे। मूल्यांकन के दौरान प्रदर्शन में महत्वपूर्ण कमी को विकास के दौरान ओवरफिटिंग द्वारा समझाया जा सकता है और इसलिए क्रॉस-सत्यापन का उपयोग करके आंशिक रूप से रोका जा सकता है। कुल मिलाकर, इमोजी जो क्रिसमस के पेड़ जैसे बहुत ही विशिष्ट संदर्भ में होते हैं, उन्हें सबसे अधिक अनुमानित पाया गया था।', 'zh': '为SemEval 2018共事者,试构一能占一言推文中最常表情符号之统。 具体来说,英语、西班牙语数各于500.000、100.000条推创练。 创此模样,首试逻辑回归器、序 LSTM、随机林回归器、 SVM。 后之见者最善,故两言独优化。 其开也,英语西班牙语之数f1得分为61与82,官方之f1得分为2118。 评性能之显降,或由开拟合过度,故或以交验防之。 大抵非常之上下文表情符号(如圣诞树)之最可测也。', 'ru': 'В рамках совместной задачи SemEval 2018 была предпринята попытка построить систему, способную прогнозировать появление наиболее часто используемых эмодзи языка в твитах. В частности, были созданы модели для данных на английском и испанском языках, которые прошли обучение по 500 000 и 100 000 твитов, соответственно. Для создания этих моделей сначала были протестированы логистический регрессор, последовательный LSTM, случайный лесной регрессор и SVM. Последняя была признана наиболее эффективной и поэтому оптимизирована индивидуально для обоих языков. Во время разработки были получены оценки f1 61 и 82 для английских и испанских данных соответственно, для сравнения, оценки f1 на официальных данных оценки были 21 и 18. Значительное снижение эффективности в ходе оценки может объясняться переоснащением в ходе разработки и, следовательно, может быть частично предотвращено с помощью перекрестной проверки. В целом, эмодзи, которые происходят в очень специфическом контексте, таком как рождественская ёлка, были признаны наиболее предсказуемыми.', 'ga': 'Mar chuid de thasc roinnte SemEval 2018 rinneadh iarracht córas a chruthú a bheadh in ann a thuar go dtarlódh an emoji is minicí a úsáidtear i dteanga in Tweets. Go sonrach, cruthaíodh samhlacha le haghaidh sonraí Béarla agus Spáinnis agus cuireadh oiliúint orthu ar 500.000 agus 100.000 tweets faoi seach. Chun na samhlacha seo a chruthú, rinneadh tástáil ar aischéimneoir lóistíochta, LSTM seicheamhach, aischéimneoir foraoise randamach agus SVM ar dtús. Fuarthas go raibh an dara ceann ag feidhmiú ab fhearr agus dá bhrí sin optamaithe ina n-aonar don dá theanga. Le linn forbartha fuarthas scóir f1 de 61 agus 82 do shonraí Béarla agus Spáinnise faoi seach, i gcomparáid, ba iad na scóir f1 ar na sonraí meastóireachta oifigiúla ná 21 agus 18. D’fhéadfaí an laghdú suntasach ar fheidhmíocht le linn meastóireachta a mhíniú trí rófheisteas le linn na forbartha agus d’fhéadfadh sé go bhféadfaí an laghdú suntasach ar fheidhmíocht le linn na meastóireachta a mhíniú. dá bhrí sin a chosc go páirteach trí úsáid a bhaint as tras-bhailíochtú. Thar aon ní eile, fuarthas amach go raibh emoji a tharlaíonn i gcomhthéacs an-sonrach ar nós crann Nollag intuartha.', 'el': 'Στο πλαίσιο μιας κοινής εργασίας έγινε προσπάθεια δημιουργίας ενός συστήματος ικανού να προβλέψει την εμφάνιση των πιο συχνά χρησιμοποιούμενων emoji μιας γλώσσας στα tweets. Συγκεκριμένα, δημιουργήθηκαν μοντέλα για αγγλικά και ισπανικά δεδομένα και εκπαιδεύτηκαν σε 500.000 και 100.000 tweets αντίστοιχα. Για τη δημιουργία αυτών των μοντέλων, δοκιμάστηκαν πρώτα ένας υλικοτεχνικός αναδρομέας, ένας διαδοχικός αναδρομέας δασών, ένας τυχαίος αναδρομέας δασών και ένας SVM. Η τελευταία βρέθηκε ότι αποδίδει καλύτερα και ως εκ τούτου βελτιστοποιήθηκε ξεχωριστά και για τις δύο γλώσσες. Κατά τη διάρκεια της ανάπτυξης ελήφθησαν βαθμολογίες f1 61 και 82 για αγγλικά και ισπανικά αντίστοιχα, σε σύγκριση, οι βαθμολογίες f1 στα επίσημα δεδομένα αξιολόγησης ήταν 21 και 18. Η σημαντική μείωση των επιδόσεων κατά τη διάρκεια της αξιολόγησης μπορεί να εξηγηθεί από υπερβολική προσαρμογή κατά τη διάρκεια της ανάπτυξης και, ως εκ τούτου, ενδέχεται να είχε προληφθεί εν μέρει με τη χρήση διασταυρούμενης επικύρωσης. Συνολικά, τα εμόζι που εμφανίζονται σε ένα πολύ συγκεκριμένο πλαίσιο όπως ένα χριστουγεννιάτικο δέντρο βρέθηκαν να είναι πιο προβλέψιμα.', 'hu': 'A SemEval 2018 megosztott feladat részeként egy olyan rendszer kiépítésére tettek kísérletet, amely képes megjósolni egy nyelv leggyakrabban használt emoji előfordulását Tweetekben. Konkrétan az angol és spanyol adatokra vonatkozó modelleket 500.000, illetve 100.000 tweeten készítették és képezték. A modellek létrehozásához először egy logisztikai regresszort, egy szekvenciális LSTM-t, egy véletlenszerű erdei regresszort és egy SVM-t teszteltünk. Az utóbbi a legjobban teljesít, ezért mindkét nyelvre optimalizálva. A fejlesztés során 61-es és 82-es f1 pontszámot kaptunk angol és spanyol adatokra, összehasonlítva a hivatalos értékelési adatok f1 pontszáma 21, illetve 18 volt. Az értékelés során bekövetkezett jelentős teljesítménycsökkenés magyarázható a fejlesztés során bekövetkezett túlteljesítéssel, és ezért részben megakadályozható a keresztvalidáció alkalmazásával. Mindenekelőtt a legkiszámíthatóbbnak találták azokat az emojikat, amelyek egy nagyon konkrét kontextusban, mint például egy karácsonyfa.', 'ka': '2018 წლის SemEval-ის ნაწილი გაყოფილი საქმე იქნება სისტემის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ძალიან წარმოდგინოთ ენის საუკეთესო გამოყენებული ემოჯიას Tweets-ში. განსაკუთრებულია, ანგლისური და სპანელი მონაცემების მოდელები შექმნა და განსწავლა 500.000 და 100.000 tweets-ში. ამ მოდელების შექმნა, პირველად ლოგისტიკური რეგრესორი, შემდეგი LSTM, შემდეგი ქონური რეგრესორი და SVM ტესტირებულია. შემდეგ მოიძლება ყველაზე საუკეთესო გავაკეთოთ და ამიტომ ორივე ენებისთვის აპტიმიზებული. განვითარების დროში 61 და 82 წერტილები ანგლისური და სპანელი მონაცემებისთვის მიღებულია. შემდგომარებით, f1-წერტილები официальных მონაცემების მონაცემებისთვის 21 და 18 წერტილები იყო. შეიძლება განვითარების გასაკეთებელობის გასაკეთებელობის გასაკეთებელობა შეიძლება აღწერა, როგორც განვითარების გასაკეთებელობის გასაკეთებელობით, და შეიძლება დანაწილად გადახმა ყველაფერი, ემოჯია, რომელიც ძალიან განსაკუთრებული კონტექსტში მოხდება, როგორც ბოლოდონის ეხე, იქნება უფრო წარმოდგენილი.', 'it': "Nell'ambito di un compito condiviso di SemEval 2018 è stato fatto un tentativo di costruire un sistema in grado di prevedere l'occorrenza delle emoji più utilizzate di una lingua nei Tweet. Nello specifico, sono stati creati e formati modelli per i dati in inglese e spagnolo rispettivamente su 500.000 e 100.000 tweet. Per creare questi modelli sono stati testati dapprima un regressore logistico, un LSTM sequenziale, un regressore forestale casuale e un SVM. Quest'ultimo è stato trovato per le migliori prestazioni e quindi ottimizzato individualmente per entrambe le lingue. Durante lo sviluppo sono stati ottenuti punteggi f1 di 61 e 82 per i dati inglesi e spagnoli rispettivamente, in confronto, punteggi f1 sui dati ufficiali di valutazione erano 21 e 18. La significativa diminuzione delle prestazioni durante la valutazione potrebbe essere spiegata da sovradimensionamento durante lo sviluppo e quindi potrebbe essere stata parzialmente prevenuta utilizzando la convalida incrociata. Soprattutto, le emoji che si verificano in un contesto molto specifico come un albero di Natale sono state trovate per essere più prevedibili.", 'kk': '2018 жылдың semiEval тапсырмасының бөлігі ретінде Твиттерде ең көп қолданылатын эмоджтердің болуын бақылайтын жүйесін құру әрекеті болды. Ағылшын және Испан деректерінің үлгілері 500.000 және 100.000 tweets арқылы құрылды. Бұл үлгілерді құру үшін, біріншіден логистикалық регрессор, кездейсоқ LSTM, кездейсоқ орман регрессоры және SVM тексерілді. Соңғысы ең жақсы жұмыс істеу үшін табылды, сондықтан екі тіл үшін бір-біріне оптимизацияланды. f1- нәтижесі 61 және 82- нәтижесін жасау кезінде ағылшын және Испан деректеріне сәйкес қатынады. Салыстыру кезінде, официалдық оқу деректерінің f1- нәтижесі 21 және 18 болды. Бағалау кезінде ең маңызды жылдамдығын азайту мүмкін, жасау кезінде өзгерту кезінде түсінікті болуы мүмкін, сондықтан бірнеше тексеру арқылы бөлігін бөліктеу мүмкін. Барлығында, Кристмес ағашындағы көптеген мәзірлер көптеген мәзірлер көптеген.', 'lt': 'Kaip dalis 2018 m. SemEval bendros užduoties buvo bandyta sukurti sistemą, kuri galėtų prognozuoti kalbos dažniausiai naudojamų emodžių atsiradimą Tweetuose. Konkrečiai, anglų ir ispanų duomenų modeliai buvo sukurti ir apmokyti atitinkamai 500 000 ir 100 000 tweetų. Siekiant sukurti šiuos modelius, pirmiausia buvo išbandytas logistinis regresantas, sekacinis LSTM, atsitiktinis miškų regresantas ir SVM. Nustatyta, kad pastarosios geriausiai veikia ir todėl individualiai optimizuotos abiejose kalbose. Vystymosi metu atitinkamai anglų ir ispanų duomenims gauti f1 balai buvo 61 ir 82, palyginti su f1 balais pagal oficialius vertinimo duomenis buvo 21 ir 18. Vertinimo metu žymiai sumažėjo veiksmingumas, kuris gali būti paaiškintas per dideliu įrengimu vystymosi metu, todėl jį iš dalies būtų galima užkirsti kelią naudojant kryžminį patvirtinimą. Apskritai buvo nustatyta, kad emodži, kurie atsiranda labai konkrečiu kontekstu, pvz., Kalėdų medžiu, yra labiausiai nuspėjami.', 'mk': "As part of a SemEval 2018 shared task an attempt was made to build a system capable of predicting the occurence of a language's most frequently used emoji in Tweets.  Специфично, моделите за англиски и шпански податоци беа создадени и обучени на 500.000 и 100.000 твитови. За да се создадат овие модели, прво беа тестирани логистички регресор, секвенцијален ЛСТМ, случајен шумски регресор и СВМ. Последниот беше најдобар резултат и затоа оптимизиран индивидуално за двата јазици. За време на развојот беа добиени f1-оценки од 61 и 82 за англиски и шпански податоци, во споредба со f1-оценките на официјалните податоци за проценка беа 21 и 18. Сигурното намалување на резултатите за време на евалуацијата може да се објасни со прекумерно поставување за време на развојот и затоа може делумно да се спречи со користење на крстовалидација. Најчесто, емоџи кои се случуваат во многу специфичен контекст како што е Божиќното дрво се најдоа најпредвидливи.", 'ms': 'Sebagai sebahagian dari tugas berkongsi SemEval 2018, cubaan dibuat untuk membina sistem yang mampu meramalkan kejadian emoji bahasa yang paling sering digunakan dalam Tweets. Secara khusus, model untuk data Bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol dicipta dan dilatih pada 500.000 dan 100.000 tweet sesuai. Untuk mencipta model-model ini, pertama-tama regresor logistik, LSTM jujukan, regresor hutan rawak dan SVM telah diuji. Yang terakhir ditemui untuk melaksanakan yang terbaik dan oleh itu diterima secara individu untuk kedua-dua bahasa. Semasa pembangunan mencapai skor f1 61 dan 82 diterima untuk data Bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol secara berdasarkan perbandingan, skor f1 pada data penilaian rasmi adalah 21 dan 18. Kekurangan signifikan prestasi semasa penilaian mungkin dijelaskan oleh overfitting semasa pembangunan dan mungkin sebahagian telah dicegah dengan menggunakan cross-validation. Lebih dari semua, emoji yang berlaku dalam konteks yang sangat spesifik seperti pokok Krismas ditemui sebagai yang paling terduga.', 'mt': "Bħala parti minn kompitu kondiviż SemEval 2018 sar tentattiv biex tinbena sistema li kapaċi tipprevedi l-okkorrenza ta' emoji użati l-aktar ta' lingwa fit-Tweets. B’mod speċifiku, inħolqu mudelli għad-dejta Ingliża u Spanjola u nħarrġu fuq 500,000 u 100,000 tweet rispettivament. Sabiex jinħolqu dawn il-mudelli, l-ewwel ġew ittestjati regressur loġistiku, LSTM sekwenzjali, regressur każwali tal-foresti u SVM. Dan tal-aħħar instab li jwettaq l-aħjar u għalhekk ottimizzat individwalment għaż-żewġ lingwi. Matul l-iżvilupp ġew miksuba punteġġi f1 ta’ 61 u 82 għal dejta Ingliża u Spanjola rispettivament, meta mqabbla, punteġġi f1 fuq id-dejta ta’ evalwazzjoni uffiċjali kienu 21 u 18. It-tnaqqis sinifikanti fil-prestazzjoni matul l-evalwazzjoni jista’ jiġi spjegat permezz ta’ tagħmir żejjed matul l-iżvilupp u għalhekk jista’ jiġi parzjalment evitat bl-użu ta’ validazzjoni inkroċjata. Fuq kollox, emoji li jseħħu f’kuntest speċifiku ħafna bħal siġar tal-Milied instabu li huma l-aktar prevedibbli.", 'mn': '2018 оны SemEval-ын нэг хэсэг хэлэхэд хэлний хамгийн ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг эможийг Твитт дээр таамаглах боломжтой системийг бүтээхэд оролдсон. Ялангуяа Англи болон Испанийн өгөгдлийн загварууд 500.000, 100.000 tweets дээр бүтээсэн ба сургалт хийгдсэн. Эдгээр загваруудыг бий болгохын тулд эхлээд логик репрессор, дараагийн LSTM, санамсаргүй ой репрессор болон SVM шалгалттай байсан. Сүүлчийн нь хамгийн сайн ажиллагааг хийж, тэгэхээр хоёр хэл хоёуланг нь хамгийн сайн ажиллаж байна. Дэлхийн хөгжлийн хувьд 61, 82 оноо Англи болон Испан өгөгдлийн хувьд харьцуулахдаа үндсэн дүгнэлт өгөгдлийн хувьд f1 оноо 21, 18 байсан. Үүний шалгалтын үед ажиллагааны үнэ цэнэтэй багасгал хөгжлийн үед илүү тодорхой байж магадгүй. Ийм учраас олон шалгалтыг ашиглан хэсэг хэсэг нь бэрхшээлтэй болно. Үүний хувьд, Зульсын мод шиг маш тодорхой тодорхой нөхцөлд гарч ирсэн эможи нь хамгийн тодорхой байдаг.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018-ന്റെ ഒരു ഭാഗമായി പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരു ശ്രമം ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചിരുന്നു. ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും പ്രാവശ്യം ഉപയോഗിക് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷ് ഡേറ്റായുമായുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. 500,000 ട്ട ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു ലോഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് റിക്രസ്റ്റര്\u200d, പിന്നീട് ഒരു LSTM, ഒരു കുറ്റമില്ലാത്ത വനത്തിന്റെ റിസ് അവസാനം ഏറ്റവും നല്ലത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതായി കണ്ടെത്തി. അതുകൊണ്ട് രണ്ടു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും വ്യക്തിപര എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് 61, 82 എന്നിവയെ കണ്ടുമുട്ടിയപ്പോള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും സ്പാനിഷ് ഡേറ്റാകള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d ലഭ്യമായിരുന്നു. അത വികസിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാന കുറവ് വ്യക്തമാക്കിയേക്കാം എല്ലായിടത്തും, ഒരു ക്രിസ്തുമസ് വൃക്ഷത്തെപ്പോലുള്ള ഒരു പ്രത്യേക പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഇമോജി ഏറ്റവും പ്രവച', 'no': 'Som ein del av ein semiEval 2018 delt oppgåve ble ein prøv på å bygge eit systemet som kan foregå framsyning av ein språk som er mest ofte brukt emoji i Tweets. Spesielt er modeller for engelsk og spansk data laga og trenga på 500,000 og 100,000 tweets. For å laga desse modelane, ble først testa eit logistisk regressor, ein sekvensisk LSTM, ein tilfeldig skog regressor og ein SVM. Den siste vart funne å utføra beste og derfor optimalisert individuelt for begge språk. På utviklinga av f1- poeng med 61 og 82 vart fått for angleske og spanske data, i sammenligning var f1- poeng på dei offisielle evalueringsdata 21 og 18. Det viktigste nedgang i utviklinga kan forklares ved å overpassa i utviklinga og derfor kan delvis være hindra ved å bruka kryssverding. I alt var emoji som skjer i eit veldig spesifikk kontekst som eit Christmas tree funne som mest foregåande.', 'pl': 'W ramach wspólnego zadania SemEval 2018 podjęto próbę zbudowania systemu zdolnego do przewidywania występowania najczęściej używanych emoji języka w Tweetach. W szczególności modele danych angielskich i hiszpańskich zostały stworzone i przeszkolone odpowiednio na tweetach 500.000 i 100.000. W celu stworzenia tych modeli najpierw testowano regresor logistyczny, sekwencyjny LSTM, losowy regresor lasu i SVM. Ten ostatni okazał się najlepszy i dlatego zoptymalizowany indywidualnie dla obu języków. W trakcie opracowywania uzyskano punkty f1 61 i 82 odpowiednio dla danych angielskich i hiszpańskich, w porównaniu z oficjalnymi danymi ocenianymi f1 21 i 18. Znaczący spadek wydajności podczas oceny może być wyjaśniony przez nadmierne dopasowanie podczas opracowywania i dlatego częściowo mogło zostać zapobiegane poprzez zastosowanie walidacji krzyżowej. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, emoji, które występują w bardzo konkretnym kontekście, takim jak choinka, okazały się najbardziej przewidywalne.', 'ro': 'Ca parte a unei sarcini comune SemEval 2018 a fost făcută o încercare de a construi un sistem capabil să prevină apariția celui mai frecvent utilizat emoji al unei limbi în Tweets. Mai exact, modele pentru datele în limba engleză și spaniolă au fost create și instruite pe 500.000 și respectiv 100.000 tweet-uri. Pentru a crea aceste modele, au fost testate mai întâi un regresor logistic, un LSTM secvențial, un regresor forestier aleatoriu și un SVM. S-a constatat că acesta din urmă performează cel mai bine și, prin urmare, optimizat individual pentru ambele limbi. În timpul dezvoltării scorurilor f1 de 61 şi 82 au fost obţinute pentru datele din limba engleză şi respectiv spaniolă, în comparaţie, scorurile f1 din datele oficiale de evaluare au fost de 21 şi 18. Scăderea semnificativă a performanței în timpul evaluării ar putea fi explicată prin supraadaptarea în timpul dezvoltării și, prin urmare, ar fi putut fi prevenită parțial prin utilizarea validării încrucișate. În general, emoji-urile care apar într-un context foarte specific, cum ar fi un pom de Crăciun s-au dovedit a fi cele mai previzibile.', 'sr': 'Kao deo zadatka semiEvala 2018, pokušao je izgraditi sistem sposoban za predviđanje događaja najčešće korištenijih emoji jezika u Tweets-u. Posebno, modeli engleskog i španjolskog podataka su stvoreni i obučeni na 500.000 i 100.000 tweets. Da bi stvorili te modele, prvo su testirani logistički regressor, sekvencijalni LSTM, nasumični šumski regressor i SVM. Posljednji je pronađen da izvršava najbolje i stoga se optimizira individualno za oba jezika. Tokom razvoja f1-rezultata od 61 i 82 dobili su odgovarajući engleskim i španjolskim podacima, u usporedbi, f1-rezultati o zvaničnim podacima procjene bile su 21 i 18. Značajno smanjenje učinkovitosti tijekom procjene može biti objašnjeno prekompatiranjem tijekom razvoja i stoga se djelomično sprečava koristeći cross-validation. Uglavnom, emoji koji se dešavaju u vrlo specifičnom kontekstu kao što je Božićno drvo najpredvidljivije.', 'sv': 'Som en del av SemEval 2018 delade uppgifter gjordes ett försök att bygga ett system som kunde förutsäga förekomsten av ett språks mest använda emoji i Tweets. Specifikt har modeller för engelska och spanska data skapats och tränats på 500 000 respektive 100 000 tweets. För att skapa dessa modeller testades först en logistisk regressor, en sekventiell LSTM, en slumpmässig skogsregressor och en SVM. Det senare visade sig fungera bäst och optimerades därför individuellt för båda språken. Under utvecklingen erhölls f1-poäng på 61 respektive 82 för engelska respektive spanska data, i jämförelse var f1-poäng på officiella utvärderingsdata 21 respektive 18. Den betydande minskningen av prestanda under utvärderingen kan förklaras av överanpassning under utvecklingen och kan därför delvis ha förhindrats genom korsvalidering. Sammantaget visade emoji som förekommer i ett mycket specifikt sammanhang som en julgran sig vara mest förutsägbara.', 'so': 'Sida qeyb ka mid ah SemEval 2018 waxaa la sameeyay isku dayo in la dhiso nidaam awoodo inuu ka hor dhigo dhacda emoji ee luqada ugu badan ee lagu isticmaalay Tweetka. Si gaar ah waxaa loo abuuray tusaalooyin ku saabsan macluumaadka Ingiriiska iyo Isbanish lagu tababariyey 500,000 iyo 100,000 twitter. Si loo sameeyo tusaalahan, marka hore waxaa la imtixaamay qof logistic regressor, dabadeed LSTM, qof kaynta hoos u dhaca iyo SVM. Ka dambeeya waxaa la helay in la sameynayo si wanaagsan, sababtaas darteed waxaa loo doortay si gaar ah labada luqadood. Wakhti la horumariyey waxaa la helay qiyaastii af-1-score ee 61 iyo 82 si u eg ingiriisi iyo Isbanish, barbardhig ahaan macluumaadka qiimeynta rasmiga ah waxay ahaayeen 21 iyo 18. Qiimeynta waxaa laga yaabaa in la caddeeyo dhamaanka muhiimka ah marka la qiimeynayo in la soo badiyo marka la kordhiyo, sidaas darteed waxaa laga yaabaa in qayb ahaan looga hor maro isticmaalka korsashada. Dhammaan waxaa laga helaa emoji oo ku dhaca xaalad aad u gaar ah sida geed julismaska ah.', 'si': 'සෙම්වෙල් 2018 කාර්යයේ කොටසක් විතරයි, ට්විට්ස් වල භාෂාවේ සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිත වලට භාවිත කරපු එමෝජි වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න විශේෂයෙන්ම, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් දත්ත සඳහා මොඩේල් හදලා තියෙන්නේ 500.000 සහ 100.000 ට්විට් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නය මේ මොඩල් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, පළමුවෙන් ලොජිස්ටික් රිග්\u200dරේස්ටර්, පසුවෙන් LSTM, ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කුළුණු රිග්\u200dරේස්ටර් සහ SV අන්තිම භාෂාවක් දෙන්නම් වෙනුවෙන් හොඳම ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න හිටියා. ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෙන් f1-scores of 61 and 82 කලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් දත්ත සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෙන් ලැබුණා, සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, f1-scores on the විශාලනයේ විශාලනයේ විශාලනයේ විශාලනය අඩුවෙන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරන්න, ඒ වගේම විශාල හැම දෙයක්ම, එමෝජී විශේෂ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධයක් වෙනවා වගේම ක්\u200dරිස්මාස් ගස් වලින් හොයාගත්තා වි', 'ur': 'ایک سمیوئل 2018 کی حصہ میں ایک کام شریک کیا گیا تھا کہ ایک سیستم بنانے کی کوشش تھی جو ٹویٹوں میں بہت سے زیادہ استعمال ہونے والی زبان کی موجود ہوتی ہے۔ مخصوص طور پر، انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی ڈاٹوں کے نمونے 500.000 اور 100.000 ٹویٹوں پر پیدا کئے گئے ہیں۔ یہ موڈل بنانے کے لئے پہلے ایک لوجیسٹیک ریگرس، ایک لس ٹیم، ایک طرح طرح کے جنگل ریگرس اور ایک SVM آزمائش کی گئی۔ آخرین کو اچھا کام کرنا پایا گیا اور اس لئے دونوں زبانوں کے لئے اچھا کام کرنا پایا گیا۔ ف۱ و ۸۲ کے درمیان انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی ڈاکٹوں کے لئے مختلف طریقہ سے فائدۂ ۱-اسکورٹ کی گئی تھی، ان کے مقابلہ میں ف۱-اسکورٹ 21 اور 18 تھے. ارزیابی کے موقع عملکرد کی ضرورت کمی کی گھٹی توسعہ کے ذریعہ تغییر فائدہ کے ذریعہ تغییر فائدہ کے ذریعہ بتائی جاتی ہے اور اس وجہ سے ممکن ہے کہ کئی طرح کی تحقیق کے ذریعہ ایک طرح بالکل، ایموجی جو ایک بہت خاص متصلہ میں اترتی ہے جیسے کریسمس درخت بہت پیش بینی ہے۔', 'ta': 'SemEval 2018 ஒரு பகிர்ந்த பணியின் பகிர்ந்து ஒரு முயற்சி உருவாக்குவதற்கு முயற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது மொழியின் அதிகமாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட emoji இருந்து ம குறிப்பிட்டு, ஆங்கிலத்துக்கும் ஸ்பானிஷ் தரவுக்கும் மாதிரிகளுக்கும் மாதிரிகள் 500.000 மற்றும் 100.000 டுவைட்ட இந்த மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு, முதலில் ஒரு logistic regressor, பின்வரும் LSTM, ஒரு குறிப்பில்லாத காட்டு மீட்டுவாளர் மற்றும் ஒரு SVM சோ கடைசி சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தல் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்டது அதனால் இரண்டு மொழிகளுக்கும் தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பட்ட மு 61 மற்றும் 82 புள்ளிகள் சந்திக்கப்பட்ட போது ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் தரவுக்கு, ஒப்பிடுவதில் F1- புள்ளிகள் இருந்தது 21 மற்றும் 18 ஆகும். பரிசோதனையின் போது செயல்பாட்டின் முக்கியமான குறைவு உருவாக்கத்தின் மூலம் அதிகரித்து விளக்கப்படும் அதனால் பிரிவில் செல மேலும், ஒரு கிறிஸ்துமஸ் மரத்தை போன்ற ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட சூழ்நிலையில் emoji அது மிகவும் முன்தெரியவில்லை.', 'uz': "SemEval 2018'ning bir qismi bo'lgan vazifaning qismlari bilan Twitterdan foydalanilgan eng ko'p foydalanilgan emoji bo'lishi mumkin tizimni yaratish uchun harakat qildi. Ko'rsatilgan ingliz va Ispancha maʼlumotlar uchun modellar boshqacha 500.000 va 100.000 tweeti bilan yaratildi. Bu modellarni yaratish uchun, birinchi logistik boshqaruvchisi, keyingi LSTM, cheksiz yon boshqaruvchisi va SVM tizimini tekshirilgan. Keyingi paytda eng yaxshi bajarish topildi va shuning uchun ikkita tillar uchun shaxsiy o'xshash ko'rinadi. 61 va 82 darajada bir xil ingliz va Ispanchaga maʼlumot uchun f1 scori olingan paytda rasm qiymatlar maʼlumotiga bir xil f1 scori 21 va 18. Taʼminlovchi soʻzda bajarish jarayonlarida katta kamaytirish mumkin, taʼminlovchi soʻzda ko'payishi mumkin va shunday qilishi mumkin, qisqa oʻzgaruvchini ishlatish mumkin. Ko'pchilikda, emoji, Krismas daraxt xususiyatlarida juda muhim mavjud bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Là một phần của nhiệm vụ chia s ẻ SemEvl vượt vượt vượt qua việc xây dựng một hệ thống dự đoán sự hiện diện của biểu tượng được sử dụng thường xuyên trong Tweet. Cụ thể là, mô hình của dữ liệu Anh và Tây Ban Nha được tạo ra và huấn luyện trên đỉnh 500.000 và 100.000. Để tạo ra những mô hình này, trước tiên là một tác nhân chuyển hóa, một LSTM lặp lại, một cây trồng trồng ngầm ngẫu nhiên và một cỗ máy SVM đã được thử nghiệm. Cuối cùng được tìm thấy có hiệu quả tốt nhất và do đó được tối ưu cho cả hai ngôn ngữ. Trong suốt thời gian lắp mô f1-điểm 61 và 82 được thu thập liên kết cá độ Anh và Tây Ban Nha, so sánh, f1-điểm trên dữ liệu đánh giá chính là 21 và 18. Sự giảm đáng kể hiệu suất trong cuộc đánh giá có thể được giải thích bằng việc tăng lương trong thời gian phát triển và có thể bị ngăn chặn một phần bằng việc kiểm tra chéo. Trên hết, các biểu tượng xuất hiện trong một hoàn cảnh rất cụ thể như một cây thông Noel là dễ đoán nhất.', 'bg': 'Като част от споделената задача е направен опит да се изгради система, способна да предвиди появата на най-често използваните емоджи в Туийтс езици. По-конкретно, модели за английски и испански данни бяха създадени и обучени съответно на 500 000 и 100 000 туита. За да се създадат тези модели, първо са тествани логистичен регресор, последователен LSTM, случаен горски регресор и SVM. Установено е, че последният е най-добър и следователно оптимизиран индивидуално за двата езика. По време на развитието са получени резултати от 61 и 82 съответно за английски и испански, като за сравнение резултатите от официалните оценки са 21 и 18. Значителното намаление на ефективността по време на оценката може да се обясни с прекомерно приспособяване по време на разработването и следователно би могло частично да бъде предотвратено чрез използване на кръстосано валидиране. В крайна сметка, емоджи, които се случват в много специфичен контекст, като коледно дърво, са най-предвидими.', 'da': 'Som en del af en fælles SemEval 2018 opgave blev der gjort et forsøg på at opbygge et system, der er i stand til at forudsige forekomsten af et sprogs mest anvendte emoji i Tweets. Specielt blev modeller for engelske og spanske data oprettet og trænet på henholdsvis 500.000 og 100.000 tweets. For at skabe disse modeller blev først en logistisk regressor, en sekventiel LSTM, en tilfældig skov regressor og en SVM testet. Sidstnævnte viste sig at fungere bedst og derfor optimeret individuelt til begge sprog. Under udviklingen blev der opnået f1-score på 61 og 82 for henholdsvis engelske og spanske data, til sammenligning var f1-score på de officielle evalueringsdata 21 og 18. Det betydelige fald i ydeevnen under evalueringen kan forklares ved overtilpasning under udviklingen og kan derfor delvist være forhindret ved brug af krydsgolidelse. Overordnet set blev emoji, der forekommer i en meget specifik sammenhæng som et juletræ, fundet at være mest forudsigelige.', 'hr': 'Kao dio djelovanja semiEvala 2018. godine, pokušao je izgraditi sustav sposoban za predviđanje pojave najčešće korištenijih emoji jezika u Tweets-u. Posebno, modeli engleskih i španjolskih podataka su stvoreni i obučeni na 500.000 i 100.000 tweets. Da bi stvorili te modele, prvo su testirani logistički regressor, sekvencijalni LSTM, nasumični šumski regressor i SVM. Posljednji je pronađen kako izvršava najbolje i stoga se optimizira individualno za oba jezika. Tijekom razvoja f1-rezultata od 61 i 82 dobili su za engleski i španjolski podaci, u usporedbi, f1-rezultati o službenim procjenama bile su 21 i 18. Značajno smanjenje učinkovitosti tijekom procjene može se objasniti prekoračenjem tijekom razvoja i stoga se djelomično sprječava koristeći cross-validation. Uglavnom, emoji koji se događaju u vrlo specifičnom kontekstu kao što je Božićno drvo najpredvidljivije.', 'de': 'Im Rahmen einer gemeinsamen SemEval 2018-Aufgabe wurde versucht, ein System zu entwickeln, das das Vorkommen der am häufigsten verwendeten Emoji einer Sprache in Tweets vorhersagen kann. Insbesondere wurden Modelle für englische und spanische Daten erstellt und auf 500.000 bzw. 100.000 Tweets trainiert. Um diese Modelle zu erstellen, wurden zunächst ein logistischer Regressor, ein sequentieller LSTM, ein Random Forest Regressor und ein SVM getestet. Letzteres erwies sich als am besten und wurde daher individuell für beide Sprachen optimiert. Während der Entwicklung wurden f1-Scores von 61 und 82 für englische und spanische Daten erhalten, im Vergleich zu f1-Scores auf den offiziellen Evaluationsdaten 21 und 18. Der signifikante Leistungsrückgang während der Evaluation könnte durch Überfitting während der Entwicklung erklärt werden und könnte daher durch Cross-Validierung teilweise verhindert werden. Insgesamt erwiesen sich Emoji, die in einem sehr spezifischen Kontext wie einem Weihnachtsbaum auftreten, als am meisten vorhersehbar.', 'id': 'Sebagai bagian dari tugas SemEval 2018 berbagi, sebuah usaha dibuat untuk membangun sistem yang mampu memprediksi kejadian emoji yang paling sering digunakan dalam Tweets. Secara spesifik, model untuk data Inggris dan Spanyol diciptakan dan dilatih pada 500.000 dan 100.000 tweet sesuai. Untuk menciptakan model ini, pertama regresor logistik, LSTM sekuensial, regresor hutan acak dan SVM diuji. Yang terakhir ditemukan untuk melakukan yang terbaik dan sehingga optimasi secara individu untuk kedua bahasa. Selama mengembangkan nilai f1 61 dan 82 diperoleh untuk data Bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol secara berdasarkan, nilai f1 pada data evaluasi resmi adalah 21 dan 18. Penurunan signifikan prestasi selama evaluasi mungkin dijelaskan dengan overfitting selama pengembangan dan mungkin sebagian telah dicegah dengan menggunakan cross-validation. Lebih dari semua, emoji yang terjadi dalam konteks yang sangat spesifik seperti pohon Natal ditemukan paling terduga.', 'sw': 'Kama sehemu ya kazi ya SemEval 2018 ilishirikisha jaribio lilifanywa kutengeneza mfumo unaoweza kutabiri kutokea kwa hisia za lugha mara nyingi zilizotumiwa katika Twita. Kwa hakika, mifano kwa takwimu za Kiingereza na Kihispania ziltengenezwa na kufundishwa kwa namna ya twiti 500,000 na 100,000. Ili kutengeneza mifano hizi, kwanza mfanyakazi wa kisiasa, mstaafu wa LSTM, mfanyakazi wa msituni wa kawaida na SVM ulijaribiwa. Hali ya pili ilipatikana kufanya vizuri zaidi na kwa hiyo imevutiwa pekee kwa lugha zote. Wakati wa kukutana na vipindi vya f1 vya 61 na 82 vilipatikana kwa ajili ya takwimu za Kiingereza na Kihispania kwa kiwango fulani, kwa kulinganisha, score za f1 kuhusu data rasmi za uchunguzi zilikuwa 21 na 18. Kupungua kwa kiwango kikubwa cha utendaji wakati wa uchunguzi unaweza kufafanuliwa kwa kusambaa wakati wa maendeleo na kwa hiyo inaweza kuzuiwa kwa kutumia usahihi. Kwa ujumla wote, emoji ambao unatokea katika mazingira maalumu kama vile mti wa Krismasi ulionekana kuwa unatabiri zaidi.', 'ko': 'SemEval 2018 공유 작업의 일부로서 우리는 언어에서 가장 자주 사용하는 이모티콘이 트위터에 나타나는 것을 예측할 수 있는 시스템을 구축하고자 한다.구체적으로 각각 50만건, 10만건의 트윗에 영어와 스페인어 데이터 모델을 만들고 훈련했다.이러한 모델을 구축하기 위해 우선logistic 회귀, 순서 LSTM, 무작위 삼림 회귀와 벡터기 지원을 테스트했다.후자가 가장 잘 표현된 것으로 밝혀져 두 언어에 대해 각각 최적화를 진행했다.개발 단계에서 영어와 스페인어 데이터의 f1점은 각각 61점과 82점으로 공식 평가 데이터의 f1점은 각각 21점과 18점이었다.평가 과정에서 성능의 현저한 하락은 개발 과정에서 과도한 의합으로 인한 것일 수 있으므로 교차 검증을 통해 부분적으로 방지할 수 있다.전반적으로 특정 환경에 나타난 이모티콘(예를 들어 크리스마스 트리)이 가장 예측 가능한 것으로 여겨진다.', 'tr': '2018-nji SemEval aralygy bilen üýtgeden zadyň bir bölegi bolup Tweets içinde iň köplen ullanýan emoji bolmagyny çaklamak üçin bir sistemasy in şa edildi. Adatça, Iňlisçe we Ispanýol maglumatlary üçin örnekler 500.000 we 100.000 tweetlerde döredildi we eğitildi. Bu nusgalary bejermek üçin ilkinji logatik regressor, yzarlyk LSTM, tusgawly tokaý regressor we SVM testi edildi. Soňky iň gowy dili ýerine ýetirmek üçin tapyldy we şonuň üçin her iki dil üçin ahmal edildi. f1-अंश we ispanyola maglumaty üçin gelişmek wagtynda resmi deňleme maglumatynda f1-अंश hasaplamalar 21 we 18 boldy. Taýýarlanma wagtynda etkinlik wajyp azalyşygy gelişme wagtynda örän gowy ýagdaýda düşündirmelidir we şonuň üçin cross-validati ulanmakdan aýratyn çykarmaly bolup biler. Iň pikirimçe, noýadam agajynyň ýaly takyk bir kontekstde bolan emoji iň uly öňüşli bolup göründi.', 'fa': 'به عنوان بخشی از یک وظیفه SemEval ۲۰۱۸، یک تلاش برای ساختن یک سیستم قابل پیش بینی اتفاق عمومی از زبان استفاده از emoji در Tweets انجام شد. مخصوصاً مدل داده\u200cهای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی با توجه 500.000 و 100.000 توئیت آموزش داده شد. برای ایجاد این مدل، اول یک بازرس لوژیک، LSTM، یک بازرس جنگل تصادفی و SVM آزمایش شد. آخرین پیدا شد که بهترین عمل کند و بنابراین برای هر دو زبان به فرد بهترین عمل کند. در طول توسعه اف 1 امتياز 61 و 82 در مورد داده\u200cهای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی، در مقایسه، نمونه\u200cهای f1 در داده\u200cهای ارزیابی رسمی 21 و 18 بودند. کاهش عملکرد بزرگی در زمان ارزیابی ممکن است توضیح داده شود با افزایش زیادی در طول توسعه و ممکن است بخشی از طریق استفاده از قابلیت متفاوت جلوگیری شود. در نهایت، ایموجی که در یک محیط بسیار خاص اتفاق می افتد، مانند یک درخت کریسمس، بیشتر پیش بینی قابل پیش بینی است.', 'af': "As deel van 'n SemEval 2018 deel opdrag is 'n probeer gemaak om 'n stelsel in staat te bou om die voorkoms van 'n taal se mees dikwels gebruikte emoji in Tweets te voorskou. Spesifieke is modele vir Engels en Spaanse data geskep en onderrig op 500.000 en 100.000 tweet respektief. Om hierdie modele te skep, eerste 'n logistike regressor, 'n sekwensiele LSTM, 'n willekeurige bosregressor en 'n SVM is toets. Die laaste is gevind om die beste te doen en daarom optimaliseer individueel vir beide tale. Terwyl ontwikkeling f1- telling van 61 en 82 gevind is vir Engels en Spaanse data respektief, in vergelyking, f1- telling op die offisiele evaluering data was 21 en 18. Die betekende verduur in prestasie tydens evaluering kan deur oorgepas tydens ontwikkeling verduidelik word en dalk mag deel voorgestel word deur kruis-validigering te gebruik. Oor alles, emoji wat in 'n baie spesifieke konteks gebeur soos 'n Christmas boom is gevind om mees voorskoubaar te wees.", 'nl': 'Als onderdeel van een SemEval 2018 gedeelde taak werd geprobeerd om een systeem te bouwen dat de aanwezigheid van de meest gebruikte emoji van een taal in Tweets kan voorspellen. Specifiek werden modellen voor Engelse en Spaanse data gemaakt en getraind op respectievelijk 500.000 en 100.000 tweets. Om deze modellen te maken werden eerst een logistieke regressor, een sequentiële LSTM, een random forest regressor en een SVM getest. De laatste bleek het beste te presteren en daarom individueel geoptimaliseerd voor beide talen. Tijdens de ontwikkeling werden f1-scores van 61 en 82 verkregen voor respectievelijk Engelse en Spaanse gegevens, in vergelijking met f1-scores op de officiële evaluatiegegevens waren 21 en 18. De significante daling van de prestaties tijdens de evaluatie kan worden verklaard door overfitting tijdens de ontwikkeling en zou daarom gedeeltelijk kunnen worden voorkomen door cross-validatie. Over het geheel genomen bleken emoji die voorkomen in een zeer specifieke context zoals een kerstboom het meest voorspelbaar te zijn.', 'sq': 'Si pjesë e një detyre të përbashkët SemEval 2018 u bë një përpjekje për të ndërtuar një sistem të aftë për të parashikuar ndodhjen e emoxhit më të shpeshtë të një gjuhe në Tweets. Veçanërisht, modelet për të dhënat angleze dhe spanjolle u krijuan dhe u trajnuan respektivisht në 500.000 dhe 100.000 tweets. Për të krijuar këto modele, së pari u testua një regresor logjistik, një LSTM sekuencë, një regresor i rastësishëm pylli dhe një SVM. Kjo e fundit u gjet që bënte më të mirën dhe kështu u optimizua individualisht për të dy gjuhët. Gjatë zhvillimit u gjetën rezultate f1 prej 61 dhe 82 për të dhënat respektivisht angleze dhe spanjolle, në krahasim me rezultatet f1 mbi të dhënat zyrtare të vlerësimit ishin 21 dhe 18. Rritja e rëndësishme e performancës gjatë vlerësimit mund të shpjegohet nga mbipajtimi gjatë zhvillimit dhe kështu mund të jetë ndaluar pjesërisht duke përdorur kryqëvalimin. Mbi të gjitha, emoxhit që ndodhin në një kontekst shumë të veçantë si një pemë Krishtlindjeje u gjetën të jenë më të parashikueshme.', 'am': "As part of a SemEval 2018 shared task an attempt was made to build a system capable of predicting the occurence of a language's most frequently used emoji in Tweets.  በተለይም፣ ለኢንጂልኛ እና ለስፓኒሽ ዳታዎች ምሳሌዎችን በመፍጠር 500.000 እና 100.000 በትዊት ላይ ተማርተዋል፡፡ እነዚህን ምሳሌዎች ለመፍጠር፣ አስቀድሞ የlogistic አስተዳደር፣ የግንኙነት LSTM፣ የዱር አስተዳደር እና SVM ተፈተናል፡፡ ሁለተኛይቱ የተሻለ እና ስለዚህ ለሁለቱ ቋንቋዎች ለብቻው የተሻለ ነው፡፡ 61 እና 82 ነጥቦችን በተገናኘ ጊዜ በንግግሊዝና በስፓኒሽ ዳታ ላይ የF1 ነጥብ አካላት 21 እና 18 ናቸው፡፡ በተመሳሳይ ወቅት የድምፅ ውጤት በሚያሳፍርበት ወቅት የሚታወቅ ይችላል፡፡ ስለዚህም በመስቀል ማረጋገጫ እንዲከለክል ይችላል፡፡ በሁሉም ላይ፣ የክርስቶስ ዛፍ እንደሆነ እጅግ የተለየ የኢሜጂ ሥርዓት የሚደረገው ይታወቃል፡፡", 'hy': 'Որպես 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" հանձնարարության մի մաս փորձեցին կառուցել մի համակարգ, որը կարողանա կանխատեսել լեզվի ամենահաճախ օգտագործվող էմոջիների պատահությունը Թվիթերում: Հատկապես, անգլերենի և իսպաներենի տվյալների մոդելները ստեղծվեցին և սովորեցրեցին 500,000 և 100,000 թվիթերի վրա: Այս մոդելների ստեղծման համար առաջին հերթին ստուգեցին լոգոստիկ ռեգրեսոր, հաջորդական LSMT-ներ, պատահական անտառեգրեսոր և ԱՎՄ-ներ: Այս երկրորդը լավագույն արդյունքներ ուներ, և հետևաբար առանձին օպտիմացվեց երկու լեզուների համար: Զարգացման ընթացքում 61-ի և 82-ի f1-ի գնահատականները ստացան անգլերենի և իսպաներենի տվյալների համար, համեմատելով, պաշտոնական գնահատականների f1-ի գնահատականները 21-ի և 18-ի էին: Արժեքի ընթացքում արտադրողականության նշանակալի նվազում կարող է բացատրվել զարգացման ընթացքում չափազանց լավ տեղադրման միջոցով, և հետևաբար մասամբ կարող է կանխվել դրանց օգտագործելով խաչը հավասարման միջ Ամեն ինչ, էմոջիները, որոնք տեղի են ունենում շատ հատուկ կոնտեքստում, ինչպիսին է օրինակ Ծննդյան ծառը, բացահայտվեցին ամենականխատեսելի:', 'bs': 'Kao dio djelovanja semiEvala 2018. godine, pokušao je izgraditi sistem sposoban za predviđanje događaja najčešće korištenijih emoji jezika u Tweets-u. Posebno, modeli engleskog i španjolskog podataka su stvoreni i obučeni na 500.000 i 100.000 tweets. Da bi stvorili te modele, prvo su testirani logistički regressor, sekvencijalni LSTM, nasumični šumski regressor i SVM. Posljednji je pronađen da izvršava najbolje i stoga se optimizira individualno za oba jezika. Tokom razvoja f1-rezultata od 61 i 82 dobili su za engleski i španjolski podaci, u usporedbi, f1-rezultati o zvaničnim podacima procjene bile su 21 i 18. Značajno smanjenje učinkovitosti tijekom procjene može se objasniti prekovršavanjem tijekom razvoja i stoga se djelomično sprječava koristeći cross-validation. Uglavnom, emoji koji se dešavaju u vrlo specifičnom kontekstu kao što je Božićno drvo najpredvidljivije.', 'az': '2018-ci SemEval vəzifəs in in bir parça s ı olaraq Tövidlərdə ən çox istifadə edilən emoji olmasını təmin edə bilən bir sistem in şa edildi. İngilis və İspanyol məlumatlarının modelləri olaraq 500.000 və 100.000 twetlərə təhsil edildi. Bu modelləri yaratmaq üçün ilk dəfə lojik regressor, sıralan LSTM, rastgele bir orman regressor və SVM imtahana çəkildi. Sonuncusu ən yaxşı təqdim etmək və buna görə də hər iki dil üçün optimizlənir. İngilizce və İspanyol məlumatları üçün f1 dəqiqəsi 61 və 82 müəyyən edildiyi vaxt f1 dəqiqələrinin resmi değerlendirmə məlumatları 21 və 18 idi. Müəyyən edilmə vaxtı müəyyən edilmə vaxtı müəyyən edilmə müddətində böyük müddəti azaltmaq mümkün olar və buna görə də çoxlu təsdiqləmə vasitəsilə parça çəkilməyə mane olar. Bütün bunlar, Noel a ğacı kimi müəyyən bir məsələdə olan emoji olaraq daha tədbir olaraq görülürdü.', 'ca': "Com a part d'una tasca compartida SemEval 2018 es va fer un intent de construir un sistema capaç de predir l'aparició d'emoji d'un llenguatge que s'utilitza més sovint a Tweets. En concret, es van crear models per a les dades angleses i espanyoles i es van formar en 500.000 i 100.000 tweets respectivament. Per crear aquests models, primer van ser testats un regressor logístic, un LSTM seqüencial, un regressor aleatòric de boscos i un SVM. Aquesta última va ser la millor i, per tant, optimitzada individualment per ambdues llengües. Durant el desenvolupament es van obtenir puntuacions f1 de 61 i 82 per a les dades angleses i espanyoles respectivament, en comparació, puntuacions f1 de les dades oficials d'evaluació eren 21 i 18. La disminució significativa del rendiment durant l'evaluació podria ser explicada per la sobreafitament durant el desenvolupament i, per tant, podria haver estat parcialment evitada utilitzant la validació cruzada. En general, els emoji que ocorren en un context molt específic com un arbre de Nadal es van trobar més previsibles.", 'bn': 'সেমইভাল ২০১৮ সালের একটি কাজের অংশ হিসেবে টুইটারে ভাষার সবচেয়ে প্রায়শই ব্যবহৃত ইমোজির ঘটনা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার একটি সিস্টেম তৈরি করার চেষ্ বিশেষ করে, ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশ তথ্যের মডেল তৈরি এবং প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়েছে ৫০০,০০০ এবং ১০০,০০০ টুইটে। এই মডেলগুলো তৈরি করার জন্য প্রথমে একটি লোজিক্সিক পুনর্বেদনকারী, একটি পরীক্ষায় এলস্টিএম, একটি অদ্ভুত জঙ্গল পুনর্বেদন এবং একটি এসভিএ পরবর্তীকে দুই ভাষার জন্য ব্যক্তিগতভাবে সেরা কাজ করার জন্য পাওয়া যায়। During developmet f1-scores of 61 and 82 were obtained for English and Spanish data respectively, in comparison, f1-scores on the official evaluation data were 21 and 18.  মূল্যবোধের সময় মূল্যবোধের ক্ষেত্রে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কমে যাওয়া সম্ভবত উন্নয়নের সময় ব্যাখ্যা করা যাবে এবং তাই ক্রাস-বৈধ ব্যবহার সবচেয়ে বিশেষ করে ইমোজি যা একটি বিশেষ প্রেক্ষাপটে ঘটছে, যেমন একটি ক্রিসমাস গাছের মতো সবচেয়ে ভবিষ্যত।', 'cs': 'V rámci sdíleného úkolu SemEval 2018 byl pokus vytvořit systém schopný předpovídat výskyt nejčastěji používaných emoji jazyka ve Tweetech. Konkrétně byly vytvořeny a trénovány modely pro anglická a španělská data na 500.000 a 100.000 tweetech. Pro vytvoření těchto modelů byl nejprve testován logistický regresor, sekvenční LSTM, náhodný regresor lesa a SVM. Bylo zjištěno, že poslední byl nejlepší, a proto optimalizován individuálně pro oba jazyky. Během vývoje byly získány f1 skóre 61 a 82 pro anglická a španělská data, ve srovnání f1 skóre na oficiálních hodnotících údajích 21 a 18. Významné snížení výkonnosti během hodnocení by mohlo být vysvětleno nadměrným vybavením během vývoje, a proto by mohlo být částečně zabráněno použitím křížové validace. Emoji, které se vyskytují ve velmi specifickém kontextu, jako je vánoční strom, byly shledány jako nejvíce předvídatelné.', 'et': 'SemEval 2018 jagatud ülesande osana püüti luua süsteem, mis suudaks ennustada keele kõige sagedamini kasutatavate emojide esinemist tweetides. Täpsemalt loodi ja koolitati inglise ja hispaania andmete mudelid vastavalt 500 000 ja 100 000 säutsu abil. Nende mudelite loomiseks testiti esmalt logistilist regressorit, järjestikust LSTM, juhuslikku metsa regressorit ja SVM-i. Viimane leiti olevat parim ja seega optimeeritud individuaalselt mõlema keele jaoks. Arengu käigus said f1-skoorid vastavalt inglise ja hispaania andmete puhul 61 ja 82, võrreldes ametlike hindamisandmete f1-skoorid 21 ja 18. Tõhususe märkimisväärset vähenemist hindamise ajal võib seletada arendamise ajal toimuva ülepanekuga ning seetõttu oleks seda võinud osaliselt vältida ristvalideerimise abil. Üldiselt leiti emojid, mis esinevad väga konkreetses kontekstis, nagu jõulupuu, olevat kõige prognoositavamad.', 'fi': 'Osana SemEval 2018:n jaettua tehtävää pyrittiin rakentamaan järjestelmä, joka pystyy ennustamaan kielen useimmin käytettyjen hymiöiden esiintymistä twieteissä. Englannin ja espanjan datan mallit luotiin ja koulutettiin 500 000 tweetillä ja 100 000 tweetillä. Mallien luomiseksi testattiin ensin logistinen regressori, sekvensaalinen LSTM, satunnaismetsäregressori ja SVM. Jälkimmäinen osoittautui parhaaksi ja siksi optimoitiin yksilöllisesti molemmille kielille. Kehityksen aikana saatiin englanninkielisille ja espanjalaisille tiedoille 61 ja 82 f1-pisteet, kun taas virallisten arviointitietojen f1-pisteet olivat 21 ja 18. Suorituskyvyn merkittävä heikkeneminen arvioinnin aikana voidaan selittää ylikuormituksella kehityksen aikana, minkä vuoksi se olisi voitu osittain estää ristikkäisvalidoinnin avulla. Kaiken kaikkiaan emojit, jotka esiintyvät hyvin erityisessä kontekstissa, kuten joulukuusessa, todettiin kaikkein ennustettavimmiksi.', 'ha': "Kama rabin wani aikin SemEV 2018 ya raba aikin da aka yi jarraba wa ka gina wani na'ura wanda ke iya iya iya gabatar da shi na'urar-zaman da aka yi amfani da shi a cikin Twitter. A ƙayyade, misãlai wa data na Ingiriya da spanish aka halitta kuma aka sanar da su a taƙaluman Twitter gwargwadon watan,000 da 100,000. To, don a ƙiƙiri waɗannan misãlai, sai a jarraba farkon wata lojistic regressor, wata LSM ta daban, da kuma an sami wata SV M. An gane ta ƙarshen a tafiyar da mafi kyaun aiki, kuma don haka an yi amfani da shi kowace wa lugha biyu. Duran da aka haɗi f1-score na 61 da 82, aka motsa wa data na Inglizi da Isbanish, sami da, f1-score kan data na evaluation rasmi sun kasance 21 da 18. Ina iya bayyana ƙari mai girma ga performance a lokacin evaluation da za'a buƙata shi a lokacin developer, kuma don haka an kange shi rabo da amfani da mai maras-inganci. Ga duk da yake, Emji wanda ke fara cikin wani muhimmi mai ƙayyade kamar wata itãce ta Christmas, an gane shi mafi kusa mai gane.", 'sk': 'V okviru skupne naloge SemEval 2018 smo poskušali zgraditi sistem, ki bi lahko napovedal pojav najpogosteje uporabljenih emojijev v tujih. Natančneje, modeli za angleške in španske podatke so bili ustvarjeni in usposobljeni na 500.000 oziroma 100.000 tweets. Za izdelavo teh modelov smo najprej testirali logistični regressor, zaporedni LSTM, naključni gozdni regressor in SVM. Ugotovljeno je bilo, da je slednji najboljši in zato optimiziran individualno za oba jezika. Med razvojem so bili za angleške in španske podatke pridobljeni rezultati f1 61 oziroma 82, v primerjavi pa so bili rezultati f1 na uradnih podatkih ocenjevanja 21 oziroma 18. Znatno zmanjšanje učinkovitosti med ocenjevanjem bi bilo mogoče pojasniti s prekomerno opremljanjem med razvojem, zato bi ga bilo mogoče delno preprečiti z uporabo navzkrižne validacije. Najbolj predvidljivi so bili emoji, ki se pojavljajo v zelo specifičnem kontekstu, kot je božično drevo.', 'he': "כחלק ממשימה משותפת SemEval 2018 נעשה ניסיון לבנות מערכת מסוגלת לחזות את התרחשות של האמוג'י השתמש ביותר בשפה בטוויטס. במיוחד, דוגמנים למידע אנגלי וספרדית נוצרו ואימנו על 500,000 וטוויטים ומאוד 100,000. כדי ליצור את הדוגמנים האלה, קודם נבחן מחדש לוגיסטי, LSTM רצופי, מחדש יער אקראי ו SVM. האחרון נמצא להפעיל את הטוב ביותר ולכן אופטימי באופן אישי לשתי שפות. במהלך התפתחות התקבלו נקודות f1 של 61 ו-82 עבור נתונים אנגליים וספרדיים, בהשוואה, נקודות f1 על נתוני הערכה הרשמיים היו 21 ו-18. The significant decrease in performance during evaluation might be explained by overfitting during development and might therefore have partially be prevented by using cross-validation.  מעל הכל, אמוג'י שמתרחשים בקשר מאוד ספציפי כמו עץ חג המולד נמצאו הכי צפויים.", 'bo': 'SemEval 2018 རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཞིག་གིས་བརྗེད་སྤྱད་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་བྱས་ན། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གྲངས་ ཁྱད་པར་ན། དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱས། དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་500.000 དང་ མིག འདས་བའི་ཤོག་བྱས་ན་ཆེས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལེགས་ཤོས་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་བྱས་ན། སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཆེས developmet f1-scores of 61 and 82 were obtained for English and Spanish data respectively, in comparison, f1-scores on the official evaluation data were 21 and 18. དཔག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལེན་འཇུག་སྐབས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཉེན་དག་གིས་ཡར་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཞི་རྒྱས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་emoji་དེ་ལས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་དམིགས་པ་ཞིག་འབྱུང་།', 'jv': 'Sampeyan kang semebal 2008 didalahan nggawe sistem sing gawe nggawe Laptop" and "Desktop Paling nggo nggawe model iki, perusahaan nambah Regresor logistik, KST sing wis dipulangan, regarasor perusahaan lan SVM sing ujian. Pira sing dumadhi nggawe katunggu luwih apik lan padha pawartos nggo langgar sapa-kabeh. Ngubah Devolhmet Kayané berarti kanggo kalagayaan kanggo nggawe akeh operasi kapan-kapan kanggo nyeanye kapan nguasai kapan kanggo nggawe nguasai tindakan nggawe nguasai kapan-perusahaan Lah bener, e-monji sing paling nèng context sing dikarepaké kanggo punika Panjenenganipun duluran kanggo ngerasakno.'}
{'en': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'ar': 'EPUTION في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية مع تكييف المستخدم', 'es': 'EPUTION en SemEval-2018 Tarea 2: Predicción de Emoji con Adaptación del Usuario', 'fr': 'EPUTION à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Prédiction des emoji avec adaptation utilisateur', 'pt': 'EPUTION na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Previsão de emojis com adaptação do usuário', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のEPUTIONタスク2 ：ユーザーの適応による絵文字予測', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर EPUTION: उपयोगकर्ता अनुकूलन के साथ इमोजी भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'EPUTION на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Прогнозирование эмодзи с адаптацией пользователя', 'zh': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 任2:有用户适应性表情符号占', 'ga': 'EPUTION ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Tuar Emoji le Oiriúnú Úsáideora', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'ΕΠUTION στο έργο 2: Πρόβλεψη με προσαρμογή χρήστη', 'hu': 'EPUTION a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Emoji jóslás felhasználói adaptációval', 'it': 'EPUTION a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Predizione Emoji con adattamento utente', 'lt': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaptation', 'kk': 'EPUTION жарым- 2018 тапсырма 2: Пайдаланушының адаптациясының Emoji бағдарламасы', 'ms': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'mk': 'ЕПУЦИЈА на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Предвидување на емои со корисничка адапција', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ അഡാപ്ഷനുമായി എമോയി നിയന്ത്രണം', 'mn': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'pl': 'EPUTION na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Prognoza Emoji z adaptacją użytkownika', 'mt': 'EPUZZJONI f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 2: Tbassir Emoji bl-Adattament tal-Utent', 'no': 'EPUTION ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2: Emoji- forordning med brukarappsett', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'EPUTION la SemEval-2018 Task 2: Predicția emoji cu adaptarea utilizatorului', 'sr': 'ЕПУЦИОН на полевалу-2018 ЦАЦ 2: Предиција Емози са адаптацијом потребитела', 'so': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் EPUTION 2: பயனர் Adaption உடன் எமோயி முன்னேற்றம்', 'sv': 'EPUTION på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Emoji Prediction med användaranpassning', 'ur': 'سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۲ میں EPUTION: کارساز اڈپٹیٹ کے ساتھ Emoji پیش بینی', 'vi': 'Việc này là: mặc định của Emoji với định hình người dùng.', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifani 2: Foydalanuvchi bilan Emoji Prediction', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Прогнозиране на емоджи с адаптация на потребителя', 'da': 'EPUTION på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Emoji forudsigelse med brugertilpasning', 'nl': 'EPUTION op SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Emoji voorspelling met gebruikersaanpassing', 'de': 'EPUTION bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Emoji-Vorhersage mit Benutzeranpassung', 'fa': 'EPUTION در ماموریت ۲: پیشنهاد Emoji با تغییر کاربر', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 2: 사용자 적응 이모티콘 예측', 'hr': 'EPUTION na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 2: Emoji predviđanje s prilagodbom korisnika', 'id': 'EPUTION di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Prediksi Emoji dengan Adapsi Pengguna', 'tr': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'sw': 'UPUTO katika SemEval-2018 Kazi 2: Utawala wa Emoji kwa Mtumiaji Adaption', 'sq': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 2: Qullanıcı Adfiksiyası ilə Emoji Prediction', 'af': 'Opdrag by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Emoji voorskou met gebruiker aanpassing', 'bs': 'EPUTION na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 2: Emoji predviđanje sa adaptacijom korisnika', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'cs': 'EPUTION na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Emoji predikce s přizpůsobením uživatele', 'ca': 'EPUTION a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'fi': 'EPUTION SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Ennuste käyttäjän mukautuksella', 'et': 'EPUTION SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 2: Emoji prognoos koos kasutaja kohanemisega', 'hy': '2-րդ հանձնարարությունը՝ օգտագործողի ադապտացիայի միջոցով էմոյի կանխատեսումը', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের দ্বিতীয় প্রতিষ্ঠান: ব্যবহারকারী অ্যাডাপেশনের সাথে ইমোজি কনফিশন', 'sk': 'EPUTION na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: Napoved emojev s prilagajanjem uporabnikov', 'jv': 'PPUTion at semiinval-2020 task 2: emuji predikion with User Effection', 'he': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'bo': 'EPUTION at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction with User Adaption', 'ha': 'EMAIL OF TRANSLATORS'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our approach, called EPUTION, for the open trial of the SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. The task relates to using social media   more precisely, Twitter   with its aim to predict the most likely associated emoji of a tweet. Our solution for this text classification problem explores the idea of transfer learning for adapting the classifier based on users’ tweeting history. Our experiments show that our user-adaption method improves classification results by more than 6 per cent on the macro-averaged F1. Thus, our paper provides evidence for the rationality of enriching the original corpus longitudinally with user behaviors and transferring the lessons learned from corresponding users to specific instances.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نهجنا ، المسمى EPUTION ، للتجربة المفتوحة لـ SemEval- 2018 Task 2 ، Multilingual Emoji Prediction. تتعلق المهمة باستخدام وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي - بتعبير أدق ، تويتر - بهدف التنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية الأكثر ارتباطًا بالتغريدة. يستكشف حلنا لمشكلة تصنيف النص هذه فكرة نقل التعلم لتكييف المصنف بناءً على سجل تغريدات المستخدمين. تُظهر تجاربنا أن طريقة تكييف المستخدم لدينا تعمل على تحسين نتائج التصنيف بأكثر من 6 في المائة على متوسط الماكرو F1. وبالتالي ، تقدم ورقتنا دليلاً على عقلانية إثراء المجموعة الأصلية طوليًا بسلوكيات المستخدم ونقل الدروس المستفادة من المستخدمين المطابقين إلى حالات محددة.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa abordagem, chamada EPUTION, para o teste aberto do SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. A tarefa está relacionada ao uso de mídia social – mais precisamente, Twitter – com o objetivo de prever o emoji associado mais provável de um tweet. Nossa solução para este problema de classificação de texto explora a ideia de transferência de aprendizado para adaptar o classificador baseado no histórico de tweets dos usuários. Nossos experimentos mostram que nosso método de adaptação ao usuário melhora os resultados de classificação em mais de 6% na F1 com média macro. Assim, nosso artigo fornece evidências para a racionalidade de enriquecer o corpus original longitudinalmente com os comportamentos dos usuários e transferir as lições aprendidas dos usuários correspondentes para instâncias específicas.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro enfoque, llamado EPUTION, para la prueba abierta de la Tarea 2 de SemEval- 2018, Predicción multilingüe de emojis. La tarea se relaciona con el uso de las redes sociales, más precisamente, Twitter, con el objetivo de predecir el emoji más probable asociado a un tweet. Nuestra solución para este problema de clasificación de textos explora la idea de transferir el aprendizaje para adaptar el clasificador en función del historial de tuits de los usuarios. Nuestros experimentos muestran que nuestro método de adaptación al usuario mejora los resultados de clasificación en más de un 6 por ciento en la F1 macropromediada. Por lo tanto, nuestro artículo proporciona evidencia de la racionalidad de enriquecer el corpus original longitudinalmente con los comportamientos de los usuarios y transferir las lecciones aprendidas de los usuarios correspondientes a instancias específicas.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre approche, appelée EPUTION, pour l'essai ouvert du SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. La tâche consiste à utiliser les réseaux sociaux, plus précisément Twitter, dans le but de prédire l'émoji le plus susceptible d'être associé à un tweet. Notre solution à ce problème de classification de texte explore l'idée de l'apprentissage par transfert pour adapter le classificateur en fonction de l'historique des tweets des utilisateurs. Nos expériences montrent que notre méthode d'adaptation de l'utilisateur améliore les résultats de classification de plus de 6\xa0% sur la macro-moyenne F1. Ainsi, notre article fournit des preuves de la rationalité d'enrichir longitudinalement le corpus original avec les comportements des utilisateurs et de transférer les leçons apprises des utilisateurs correspondants à des cas spécifiques.", 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval - 2018タスク2、多言語絵文字予測のオープントライアルのためのEPUTIONと呼ばれる私たちのアプローチについて説明します。このタスクは、ツイートの最も可能性の高い関連する絵文字を予測することを目的として、ソーシャルメディア、より正確にはTwitterを使用することに関連しています。このテキスト分類問題に対する当社のソリューションは、ユーザーのツイート履歴に基づいて分類子を適応させるための転送学習のアイデアを探求しています。当社の実験によると、当社のユーザー適応法は、マクロ平均化されたF 1の分類結果を6 ％以上改善することが示されています。したがって、私たちの論文は、元のコーパスをユーザーの行動で縦断的に豊かにし、対応するユーザーから得られた教訓を特定のインスタンスに転送する合理性の証拠を提供します。', 'zh': '本文述吾法,谓之EPUTION,施于SemEval-2018务2,多言表情符号占者公试之。 其事与用社交媒体 - 更确言,Twitter - 其所以占推文之最可关者表情符号。 求迁学之解决方案,以用户推文历史记录调之。 吾实验明,吾用户自适于宏观均F1上以类增6%以上。 故本文以用户行从丰始语料库而应之用户学移于特定例之合理性。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है, जिसे EPUTION कहा जाता है, SemEval- 2018 टास्क 2, बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी के खुले परीक्षण के लिए। कार्य सोशल मीडिया का उपयोग करने से संबंधित है - अधिक सटीक रूप से, ट्विटर - एक ट्वीट के सबसे संभावित संबद्ध इमोजी की भविष्यवाणी करने के अपने उद्देश्य के साथ। इस पाठ वर्गीकरण समस्या के लिए हमारा समाधान उपयोगकर्ताओं के ट्वीटिंग इतिहास के आधार पर क्लासिफायर को अनुकूलित करने के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखने के विचार की पड़ताल करता है। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी उपयोगकर्ता-अनुकूलन विधि मैक्रो-औसत F1 पर 6 प्रतिशत से अधिक वर्गीकरण परिणामों में सुधार करती है। इस प्रकार, हमारा पेपर उपयोगकर्ता व्यवहार के साथ अनुदैर्ध्य रूप से मूल कॉर्पस को समृद्ध करने और संबंधित उपयोगकर्ताओं से सीखे गए पाठों को विशिष्ट उदाहरणों में स्थानांतरित करने की तर्कसंगतता के लिए सबूत प्रदान करता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наш подход, называемый EPUTION, к открытому испытанию задачи 2 SemEval- 2018, Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи. Задача связана с использованием социальных сетей — точнее, Twitter — с целью предсказать наиболее вероятные связанные эмодзи твита. Наше решение этой проблемы классификации текста исследует идею трансферного обучения для адаптации классификатора на основе истории твитов пользователей. Наши эксперименты показывают, что наш метод пользовательской адаптации улучшает результаты классификации более чем на 6 процентов по усредненному на макроуровне F1. Таким образом, наша работа предоставляет доказательства рациональности обогащения исходного корпуса в продольном направлении поведением пользователей и передачи уроков, извлеченных из соответствующих пользователей, конкретным экземплярам.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcur chuige, ar a dtugtar EPUTION, maidir le triail oscailte Tasc 2 SemEval- 2018, Prediction Emoji Ilteangach. Baineann an tasc le húsáid na meáin shóisialta - níos cruinne, Twitter - agus é mar aidhm aige an emoji is dóichí a bhaineann le tweet a thuar. Scrúdaíonn ár réiteach don fhadhb seo maidir le rangú téacs an smaoineamh maidir le foghlaim aistrithe chun an t-aicmitheoir a oiriúnú bunaithe ar stair tvuíteála na n-úsáideoirí. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go bhfeabhsaíonn ár modh oiriúnaithe úsáideora torthaí aicmithe de níos mó ná 6 faoin gcéad ar an macrai-mheán F1. Mar sin, cuireann ár bpáipéar fianaise ar fáil maidir le réasúntacht an bhunchorpais a shaibhriú go fadaimseartha le hiompraíocht úsáideoirí agus na ceachtanna a foghlaimíodh ó úsáideoirí comhfhreagracha a aistriú go cásanna sonracha.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუნტი ჩვენი წარმოდგენა, რომელსაც EPUTION, SemEval- 2018 საქმე მეორე, მრავალენგური Emoji წარმოდგენისთვის გახსნა პროცექტისთვის. დავალება შესახებ სოციალური მედიახის გამოყენებას - უფრო საკმაოდ, Twitter- სწორედ მიზეზით, რომ გადაწყენოთ საკმაოდ შესაძლებელია, რომელიც შესაძლებელია გადამ ჩვენი პასუხი ამ ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის პრობლემებისთვის გავაკვირდება გასწავლების იდეა, რომელიც კლასიფიკაციის შესაბამისთვის გამოყენებელი გასწავლების ისტო ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი მომხმარებელი აეპტიფიკაციის მეტი კლასიფიკაციის შედეგების უფრო 6 პროცენტის მაკრო განსაზღვრებული F1-ზე. ამიტომ, ჩვენი წიგნი აჩვენებს წარმოდგენების რაციონალურობას, რომელიც ორიგინალური კორპუსს განმავლობაში იქნება მომხმარებელი ქცევებით და მომხმარებელი ქცევებით გადატანაცია', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az EPUTION nevű megközelítésünket a SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction című nyílt próbára. A feladat a közösségi média - pontosabban a Twitter - használatával kapcsolatos, azzal a céllal, hogy megjósolja a tweet legvalószínűbb emoji-jét. Megoldásunk erre a szövegosztályozási problémára a transzfertanulás ötletét vizsgálja fel a felhasználók tweetelési előzményei alapján az osztályozó adaptálására. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a felhasználói adaptációs módszerünk több mint 6 százalékkal javítja az osztályozási eredményeket a makróátlagos F1-nél. Így tanulmányunk bizonyítja annak racionalitását, hogy az eredeti corpus hosszúsági szempontból gazdagítja a felhasználói viselkedésekkel és a megfelelő felhasználóktól levont tanulságokat konkrét esetekre átadja.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την προσέγγισή μας, που ονομάζεται ΕΠUTION, για την ανοικτή δοκιμή της εργασίας 2, Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη Εμόζι. Το καθήκον σχετίζεται με τη χρήση των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, δηλαδή του Twitter, με στόχο να προβλέψει το πιθανότερο συσχετιζόμενο emoji ενός tweet. Η λύση μας για αυτό το πρόβλημα ταξινόμησης κειμένου διερευνά την ιδέα της μάθησης μεταφοράς για την προσαρμογή του ταξινομητή με βάση το ιστορικό των χρηστών. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος προσαρμογής χρήστη βελτιώνει τα αποτελέσματα ταξινόμησης κατά περισσότερο από 6 τοις εκατό στο μακρομεσαίο F1. Έτσι, η εργασία μας παρέχει αποδείξεις για την ορθολογική του εμπλουτισμού του αρχικού σώματος κατά μήκος με συμπεριφορές χρηστών και της μεταφοράς των διδαγμάτων που αντλήθηκαν από τους αντίστοιχους χρήστες σε συγκεκριμένες περιπτώσεις.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro approccio, chiamato EPUTION, per la prova aperta di SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Il compito riguarda l'utilizzo dei social media - più precisamente Twitter - con l'obiettivo di prevedere le emoji associate più probabilmente a un tweet. La nostra soluzione per questo problema di classificazione del testo esplora l'idea di transfer learning per adattare il classificatore in base alla cronologia dei tweet degli utenti. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro metodo di adattamento all'utente migliora i risultati di classificazione di oltre il 6% sulla F1 macro-media. Pertanto, il nostro articolo fornisce prove della razionalità di arricchire longitudinalmente il corpus originale con comportamenti degli utenti e trasferire le lezioni apprese dagli utenti corrispondenti a istanze specifiche.", 'lt': "This paper describes our approach, called EPUTION, for the open trial of the SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  The task relates to using social media - more precisely, Twitter - with its aim to predict the most likely associated emoji of a tweet.  Our solution for this text classification problem explores the idea of transfer learning for adapting the classifier based on users' tweeting history.  Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų vartotojų pritaikymo metodas pagerina klasifikavimo rezultatus daugiau kaip 6 proc. makroekonominio vidurkio F1 atžvilgiu. Taigi mūsų dokumente pateikiami įrodymai, kad pradinis korpusas būtų praturtintas išilginiu požiūriu naudojant vartotojų elgesį ir kad atitinkamų vartotojų įgyta patirtis būtų perkelta į konkrečius atvejus.", 'mk': "This paper describes our approach, called EPUTION, for the open trial of the SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  Оваа задача се однесува на користењето на социјалните медиуми - попрецизно, Твитер - со цел да ги предвиде најверојатно поврзаните емоџи на твитот. Our solution for this text classification problem explores the idea of transfer learning for adapting the classifier based on users' tweeting history.  Our experiments show that our user-adaption method improves classification results by more than 6 per cent on the macro-averaged F1.  Thus, our paper provides evidence for the rationality of enriching the original corpus longitudinally with user behaviors and transferring the lessons learned from corresponding users to specific instances.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің EPUTION деп аталатын тәсілдерімізді 2- тапсырма, көп тілдік эмози тапсырмасының ашық сынақтарын анықтайды. Тапсырма әлеуметтік медиаға - Твиттердің дұрыс түрде - қолдану үшін қолданылатын эмоджтерді таңдау мақсатымен байланысты. Бұл мәтін классификациялау мәселесінің шешіміміз пайдаланушылардың tweeting журналына негізделген классификациялау оқыту идеясын зерттеді. Біздің тәжірибеміз пайдаланушылардың адаптациялау тәсіліміздің макро орташа F1- ге 6 процентен артық нәтижелерін жасайды. Біздің қағаздың бастапқы корпусты пайдаланушылардың әрекеттерімен ұзындығын көбейту және сәйкесті пайдаланушылардан үйренген сабақтарды нақты мәселелерді бірнеше мәселелерге аудару үші', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan kita, dipanggil EPUTION, untuk ujian terbuka SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Tugas berkaitan dengan menggunakan media sosial - lebih tepat, Twitter - dengan tujuannya untuk meramalkan emoji yang paling mungkin berkaitan dengan tweet. Solusi kami untuk masalah klasifikasi teks ini mengeksplorasi idea pembelajaran pemindahan untuk menyesuaikan klasifikasi berdasarkan sejarah tweeting pengguna. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah penyesuaian pengguna kami meningkatkan keputusan klasifikasi dengan lebih dari 6 peratus pada makro-rata F1. Oleh itu, kertas kami memberikan bukti untuk racionaliti memperkaya corpus asal secara panjang dengan perilaku pengguna dan memindahkan pelajaran yang dipelajari dari pengguna yang sepadan ke contoh tertentu.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രോഗത്തെ എപ്പുടിയന്\u200d എന്ന് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2, പല ഭാഷ എമോജിയുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണനം വി ഈ ജോലി സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു - അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ ഈ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രശ്നത്തിനുള്ള നമ്മുടെ പരിഹാരം ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ടൂട്ടിങ്ങ് ചരിത്രം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ അഡാപ്ഷന്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d ക്ലാസിഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d 6 ശതമാനം മുന അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങളുടെ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിച്ച പാഠങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള അവസ്ഥയിലേ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний EPUTION гэдэг арга зам нь SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction-ын нээлттэй судалгаанд тайлбарладаг. Энэ ажил нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээнтэй холбоотой, илүү тодорхой, Твиттер, tweet-ын хамгийн холбоотой эможийг таамаглах зорилготой. Бидний текст хуваалтын асуудлын шийдэл хэрэглэгчийн tweet түүхийн үндсэн хуваалтын суралцааны санааг судалдаг. Бидний туршилтууд бидний хэрэглэгчийн адаптацийн аргыг макро дундаж F1 дээр 6 хувь нэмэгдүүлж байна. Тиймээс бидний цаас хэрэглэгчдийн үйлдэлтэй холбоотой байдлаар эхний корпус баялагдсан урт хугацаанд баялагдсан, холбоотой хэрэглэгчдийн хичээлийг тодорхой тохиолдолд шилжүүлэх баталгаа өгч байна.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-approċċ tagħna, imsejjaħ EPUTION, għall-prova miftuħa tas-SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Il-kompitu għandu x’jaqsam mal-użu tal-midja soċjali - b’mod aktar preċiż, Twitter - bil-għan li jipprevedi l-emoji l-aktar probabbli assoċjati ta’ tweet. Is-soluzzjoni tagħna għal din il-problema tal-klassifikazzjoni tat-test tesplora l-idea tat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment għall-adattament tal-klassifikatur ibbażat fuq l-istorja tat-tweeting tal-utenti. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-metodu tagħna ta’ adattament għall-utent itejjeb ir-riżultati tal-klassifikazzjoni b’aktar minn 6 fil-mija fuq il-medja makro-F1. Għalhekk, id-dokument tagħna jipprovdi evidenza għar-razzjonalità tal-arrikkiment tal-korpus oriġinali lonġitudinali b’imġibiet tal-utenti u t-trasferiment tal-lezzjonijiet miksuba mill-utenti korrispondenti għal każijiet speċifiċi.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver tilnærminga vårt, kalla EPUTION, for den opne prøvinga av semiEval- 2018 oppgåva 2, fleirspråksprøvinga Emoji. Oppgåva relatert til å bruka sosiale medier - meir nøyaktig, Twitter - med målet til å foregå dei mest sannsynlege tilknytte emoji av ein tweet. Vårt løysing for denne tekstklassifikasjonen utforskar ideen om læring av overføring for å tilpassa klassifikasjonen basert på brukarar- tweeting- historie. Eksperimentane våre viser at brukarappsettmetoden vårt forbetrar klassifikasjonslinjeresultatet med mer enn 6 prosent på makro gjennomsnittet F1. Dette gjev papiret vårt bevis om rasjonaliteten for å rykka den originale korpusen langtidig med brukaroppførsel og overføra lesane lærte frå tilsvarande brukarar til spesifikke instansar.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasze podejście, zwane EPUTION, do otwartego próby SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Wielojęzyczna Prognoza Emoji. Zadanie związane jest z korzystaniem z mediów społecznościowych, a dokładniej Twittera, z celem przewidzenia najprawdopodobniej powiązanych emoji tweeta. Nasze rozwiązanie dla tego problemu klasyfikacji tekstu bada ideę uczenia transferowego w celu dostosowania klasyfikatora w oparciu o historię tweetów użytkowników. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że nasza metoda adaptacji użytkownika poprawia wyniki klasyfikacji o ponad sześć procent makro średniej F1. W związku z tym nasza praca dostarcza dowodów na racjonalność wzbogacania oryginalnego korpusu wzdłużnie zachowaniami użytkowników i przenoszenia wniosków wyciągniętych od odpowiednich użytkowników do konkretnych przypadków.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie abordarea noastră, denumită EPUTION, pentru trialul deschis al SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingval Emoji Prediction. Sarcina se referă la utilizarea rețelelor sociale - mai precis, Twitter - cu scopul său de a prezice cel mai probabil emoji asociat unui tweet. Soluția noastră pentru această problemă de clasificare a textelor explorează ideea de transfer learning pentru adaptarea clasificatorului pe baza istoricului tweeting al utilizatorilor. Experimentele noastre arată că metoda noastră de adaptare a utilizatorului îmbunătățește rezultatele clasificării cu mai mult de 6% pe F1 macro-medie. Astfel, lucrarea noastră oferă dovezi pentru raționalitatea îmbogățirii corpului original longitudinal cu comportamente ale utilizatorilor și transferării lecțiilor învățate de la utilizatorii corespunzători la anumite instanțe.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan wuxuu ku qoraa qaabilaadeenna lagu magacaabay EPUTION, baaritaanka furan ee shaqada SemEval-2018, qaynuunka luuqadaha badan ee Emoji. The task relates to using social media - more precisely, Twitter - with its aim to predict the most likely associated emoji of a tweet.  Xaruntayada dhibaatadan fasaxda ayaa baaraya fikrada bedelka barashada si loo beddelo fasaxa oo lagu saleynayo taariikhda tweetiga ee isticmaalayaasha. Imtixaankayada waxay muuqataa in qaababka qaabilaadda isticmaalayada uu horumariyo fasalka fasaxa waxay ka kordhisaa 6 boqolkiiba ee ugu dhexeeya F1 macro. Sidaa darteed warqaddayadu wuxuu ku fidiyaa caddeynta hodantinimada korpuska asalka ah si dheer ugu hodanayo tababaro isticmaalayaasha iyo beddelinta waxbarashada lagu baranayo isticmaalayaasha si gaar ah.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt tillvägagångssätt, kallad EPUTION, för den öppna prövningen av SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Uppgiften handlar om att använda sociala medier - mer exakt Twitter - med syftet att förutsäga den mest troliga associerade emoji av en tweet. Vår lösning på detta textklassificeringsproblem utforskar idén om transfer learning för att anpassa klassificeringen baserat på användares tweethistorik. Våra experiment visar att vår användaranpassningsmetod förbättrar klassificeringsresultaten med mer än 6 procent på det makrogränsade F1. Således ger vår uppsats bevis för rationaliteten av att berika den ursprungliga korpusen longitudinellt med användarbeteenden och överföra lärdomarna från motsvarande användare till specifika instanser.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் எங்கள் முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, EPUTION என்று அழைக்கப்பட்டது, செம்Eval- 2018 பணியின் திறந்த விசாரணைக்கு, பல மொழி எமோயி முன இந்த செயல் சமூக ஊடகங்களை பயன்படுத்துவது பற்றியது - அதிக குறிப்பிலும், துவக்கி - அதில் ஒரு தொடர்பு தொடர்புடைய உணர்வை முன்வாக இந்த உரை வகுப்பு பிரச்சனைக்கான தீர்வு எங்கள் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறது எங்கள் பயனர் ஒதுக்கும் முறைமையை வகுப்பு முடிவுகளை 6 சதவிகிதத்திற்கு மேலாக 6 சதவிகிதத்தை  எனவே, எங்கள் காகிதத்திற்கு தெளிவுகள் அளிக்கிறது மூல குறிப்பிட்ட நிகழ்வுகளுக்கு மேலும் நீண்ட பயனர் நடத்தைகளுடன் வளர்ச்சிக்கும் பொருத', 'ur': 'This paper describes our approach, called EPUTION, for the open trial of the SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. اس کا کام سوسیل میڈیا کا استعمال کرنا ہے - اس سے زیادہ دقیق، ٹویٹر - اس کا مطلب ہے کہ ایک ٹویٹ کے سب سے زیادہ مشترک ایموجی کو پیش بینی کریں۔ ہمارا حل اس ٹیکسٹ کلاسپیٹ مشکل کے لئے استعمال کرنے کے لئے ترنسیٹ سیکھنے کی تصورت کا تحقیق کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے کارساز-اڈپٹیٹ کی طریقہ مکرو متوسط F1 پر 6 فیصد سے زیادہ سی فیصد کے نتیجے سفارش کرتا ہے. اسی طرح، ہماری کاغذ نے اولین کورپوس کو فائدہ کے ساتھ وسعت دینے کے لئے ثابت قدم رکھا ہے اور استعمال کرنے والوں سے تعلیم یاد رکھنے کے لئے مخصوص مواقع کے ساتھ سکھایا ہے.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය, EPUTION කියලා තියෙනවා, සෙම්වෙල්- 2018 වැඩ 2, ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් එමෝජි ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා විවේශනය කරන සාමාජික මිඩියාව භාවිතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ට්විටර් එක්ක සාමාජික මිඩියාව භාවිතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඒකේ අදහස්  අපේ විශේෂය මේ පාළුවේ විශේෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ විශේෂණ අතිහාසය අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජක විධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානය මක්ක්\u200dරෝවිධානය F1 වලින් 6% වඩා විශේෂ ව ඉතින්, අපේ පත්තේ ප්\u200dරධාන කොර්පුස් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරභාවිත ව්\u200dයාපෘතියෙන් ප්\u200dරභාවිත ව්\u200dයාපෘතියෙන් ප්\u200dරභාවිත වැඩිය', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup, zove se EPUTION, za otvoreno suđenje zadatka 2. polevala - 2018, višejezičke Emoji predstave. Taj zadatak se odnosi na upotrebu društvenih medija - tačnije, Twitter - sa svojim ciljem da predvidi najverovatnije povezanije emoji tweet a. Naše rešenje za ovaj problem sa klasifikacijom teksta istražuje ideju učenja prijenosa za prilagodbu klasifikatora na osnovu istorije tweetinga korisnika. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš metod adaptacije korisnika poboljšava rezultate klasifikacije za više od 6 posto na makro-srednji F1. Dakle, naš papir pruža dokaze o racionalnosti bogatstva originalnog korpusa dužinski sa ponašanjem korisnika i prebacivanjem lekcija naučenih od odgovarajućih korisnika na određene slučajeve.', 'uz': "This paper describes our approach, called EPUTION, for the open trial of the SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  Bu vazifa haqida sosial media yordamida - juda muhimiy, Twitter - Twitterning eng eng eng muhimi xabar hisoblanadigan foydalanishni oldin oladi. Ushbu matn darajalashtirish muammosimiz foydalanuvchilar Twitterning tarixiga asosida o'zgartirish o'rganishni o'rganadi. Bizning tajribalarimizni ko'rsatadi, bizning foydalanuvchimiz tafsilotning natijalarini makro asosiy F1'da 6% dan ortiq darajalashtiradi. Bunday qilib, bizning qoʻllanmiz asl kompyuterning asl qo'shilga oshirishga ishlatiladigan xususiyatlarni o'zgartiradi va xizmat foydalanuvchidan foydalanuvchilarga o'rganishga o'rganadigan o'quvchilarni foydalanuvchidan foydalanuvchiga tayyorlash", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả phương pháp của chúng ta, gọi là EPUnhờ, cho thử nghiệm mở của nhiệm vụ hoàn hảo thai nghén-208, đa ngôn ngữ khó đoán. Nhiệm vụ liên quan đến việc dùng các phương tiện truyền thông xã hội... chính xác hơn là Twitter, với mục đích dự đoán biểu tượng tương tác nhiều nhất của Twitter. Cách giải quyết vấn đề phân loại văn bản này nghiên cứu ý tưởng về việc học chuyển nhượng để sửa đổi người phân loại dựa trên sử dụng Twitter. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp biến hóa người dùng của chúng tôi cải thiện kết quả phân hạng hơn sáu phần trên con F1. Do đó, văn bản của chúng tôi cung cấp bằng chứng cho sự hợp lí của việc bổ sung vật thể nguyên bản theo chiều dọc với hành vi người dùng và chuyển bài học từ người dùng tương ứng sang trường hợp cụ thể.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup, nazvan EPUTION, za otvoreno suđenje zadatka 2. polovine - 2018, višejezičke Emoji predsjednice. Taj zadatak se odnosi na upotrebu društvenih medija - tačnije, Twitter - sa svojim ciljem predvidjeti najvjerojatnije povezanije emoji tweet a. Naše rješenje za ovaj problem sa klasifikacijom teksta istražuje ideju učenja prijenosa za prilagodbu klasifikatora na temelju povijesti tweeta korisnika. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš metod prilagodbe korisnika poboljšava rezultate klasifikacije više od 6 posto na makro-srednji F1. Stoga, naš papir pruža dokaze o racionalnosti bogatstva originalnog korpusa dužinski sa ponašanjem korisnika i prebacivanja lekcija naučenih od odgovarajućih korisnika na specifične slučajeve.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашия подход, наречен ЕПЮЦИЯ, за открития процес на задача 2, многоезична прогноза за емоджи. Задачата е свързана с използването на социалните медии - по-точно Туитър - с целта си да предвиди най-вероятно свързаните емоджи на туит. Нашето решение за този проблем с класификацията на текста изследва идеята за трансферно обучение за адаптиране на класификатора въз основа на историята на туитовете на потребителите. Нашите експерименти показват, че методът ни за адаптиране на потребителя подобрява резултатите от класификацията с повече от 6% при макросреднената F1. По този начин нашата статия предоставя доказателства за рационалността на обогатяването на оригиналния корпус надлъжно с потребителско поведение и прехвърлянето на поуките, извлечени от съответните потребители към конкретни случаи.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft onze aanpak, genaamd EPUTION, voor de open proef van de SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Meertalige Emoji Prediction. De taak heeft betrekking op het gebruik van social media, namelijk Twitter, met als doel de meest waarschijnlijke bijbehorende emoji van een tweet te voorspellen. Onze oplossing voor dit tekstclassificatieprobleem onderzoekt het idee van transfer learning om de classificator aan te passen op basis van de tweetgeschiedenis van gebruikers. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat onze gebruikersaanpassingsmethode classificatieresultaten met meer dan 6 procent verbetert op de macro-gemiddelde F1. Zo levert ons artikel bewijs voor de rationaliteit van het verrijken van het oorspronkelijke corpus in de lengte met gebruikersgedrag en het overbrengen van de lessen van corresponderende gebruikers naar specifieke instanties.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores tilgang, kaldet EPUTION, til den åbne prøve af SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Opgaven vedrører brugen af sociale medier - mere præcist Twitter - med det formål at forudsige den mest sandsynlige tilknyttede emoji af en tweet. Vores løsning på dette tekstklassifikationsproblem undersøger idéen om transfer learning til at tilpasse klassificeringen baseret på brugernes tweeting historie. Vores eksperimenter viser, at vores brugertilpasningsmetode forbedrer klassifikationsresultaterne med mere end 6 procent på det makrogennemsnitlige F1. Således giver vores papir bevis for rationaliteten i at berige det oprindelige korpus længderet med brugeradfærd og overføre de erfaringer, der er lært fra tilsvarende brugere til specifikke tilfælde.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan pendekatan kita, disebut EPUTION, untuk percobaan terbuka SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Tugas ini berhubungan dengan menggunakan media sosial - lebih tepat, Twitter - dengan tujuannya untuk memprediksi emoji yang paling mungkin terkait dari tweet. Solusi kami untuk masalah klasifikasi teks ini mengeksplorasi ide transfer belajar untuk mengadaptasi klasifikasi berdasarkan sejarah tweeting pengguna. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa metode pengguna-adaptasi kami meningkatkan hasil klasifikasi dengan lebih dari 6 persen pada makro-rata F1. Jadi, kertas kami memberikan bukti untuk racionalitas memperkaya corpus asli secara panjang dengan perilaku pengguna dan memindahkan pelajaran yang dipelajari dari pengguna yang sesuai ke kasus spesifik.', 'ko': "본고는 EPUTION이라고 불리는SemEval-18퀘스트2'다국어 표정 예측'의 공개시험에 사용되는 우리의 방법을 묘사한다.이 임무는 소셜 미디어를 사용하는 것과 관련이 있다. 더 정확히 말하면 트위터를 통해 트위터에서 가장 연관성이 있는 이모티콘을 예측하는 것이다.우리는 사용자의 추문 역사에 따라 분류기를 조정하기 위해 이 텍스트 분류 문제의 해결 방안에 대해 이동 학습 사상을 탐색했다.우리의 실험은 우리의 사용자 적응 방법이 분류 결과를 매크로 평균 F1에서 6% 이상 높였다는 것을 보여 주었다.따라서 본고는 원시 어료 라이브러리의 사용자 행위를 종적으로 풍부하게 하고 해당 사용자로부터 얻은 경험과 교훈을 구체적인 실례로 옮기는 합리성에 증거를 제공했다.", 'tr': "Bu kağıt, EPUTION adında, SemEval-2018 Görev 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction için açık sınavımızı anlatır. Bu zady sosyal medýdanlary ulanmak üçin - dogry ýagdaýda Twitter - tweetin iň ahmal emojilerini çaklamak üçin maksady bilen. Biziň çözümüz şu metin klasifikasyýanyň meselesi ullançylaryň tweet taryhyna daýanýan klasifikaty öwrenmek üçin pikirini keşfetýär. Biziň deneylerimiz ulançylarymyzdan uygulama yöntemimiziň makro ortalamaly F1'de 6%-den köp netijelerimizi geliştirir. Şonuň üçin biziň kagyzymyz özüniň korpusynyň özüniň ýokary ýagdaýynda ulanylaryň hereketleri bilen baglanmagyň dogrylygyny we tutuşan sapaklary häsiýetlendirmegi üçin tassyklandyrýar.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ روش ما را توصیف می\u200cکند، به نام EPUTION، برای محاکمه باز عملیات نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸، پیشنهاد Emoji Multilingual. این وظیفه با استفاده از رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی - دقیقاً توئیتر - با هدف آن برای پیش بینی کردن احتمالات ترین ایموجی\u200cهای یک توئیت است. راه حل ما برای این مشکل تنظیم متن ایده یادگیری انتقال را برای تغییر دادن راهنمایی بر اساس تاریخ توئیت کاربر تحقیق می کند. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که روش اضافه کردن کاربر ما نتیجه\u200cهای مختصات را بیش از ۶ درصد بر میکرومتوسط F1 بهتر می\u200cکند. بنابراین، کاغذ ما مدرک های منطقی برای ثروت کردن شرکت اصلی با رفتارهای کاربر و transferring lessons learned from corresponding users to specific instances پیش می دهد.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan qasjen tonë, të quajtur EPUTION, për gjyqin e hapur të SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Detyra lidhet me përdorimin e medias sociale - më saktësisht, Twitter - me qëllimin e saj për të parashikuar emoxhin më të ngjarë të lidhur me një tweet. Zgjidhja jonë për këtë problem klasifikimi teksti eksploron idenë e transferimit të mësimit për përshtatjen e klasifikuesit bazuar në historinë e tweetingut të përdoruesve. Our experiments show that our user-adaption method improves classification results by more than 6 per cent on the macro-averaged F1.  Kështu, letra jonë ofron prova për racionalitetin e pasurimit të korpusit origjinal në mënyrë të gjatë me sjelljet e përdoruesve dhe transferimin e mësimeve të mësuara nga përdoruesit korrespondent në raste të caktuara.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unseren Ansatz, genannt EPUTION, für die offene Studie der SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Mehrsprachige Emoji Vorhersage. Die Aufgabe betrifft die Nutzung von Social Media, genauer gesagt Twitter, mit dem Ziel, das wahrscheinlichste assoziierte Emoji eines Tweets vorherzusagen. Unsere Lösung für dieses Textklassifizierungsproblem untersucht die Idee des Transfer Learning zur Anpassung des Klassifikators basierend auf der Tweeting-Historie der Nutzer. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass unsere Benutzeradaptionsmethode die Klassifizierungsergebnisse um mehr als 6 Prozent auf dem makro-gemittelten F1 verbessert. So liefert unser Beitrag Belege für die Rationalität, den ursprünglichen Korpus längs mit Nutzerverhalten anzureichern und die von entsprechenden Nutzern gewonnenen Erkenntnisse auf spezifische Instanzen zu übertragen.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mbinu yetu, inayoitwa EPUTION, kwa mashitaka ya wazi ya kazi ya SemEval-2018, Udhibiti wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji. Kazi hiyo inahusiana na kutumia mitandao ya kijamii - kwa hakika, Twita - lengo lake la kutabiri hisia zinazohusiana zaidi na twita. Tatizo letu la tatizo hili la kutangaza tatizo la kutangaza wazo la kujifunza kwa ajili ya kubadilisha darasa kwa kutumia historia ya twita ya watumiaji. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu ya matumizi ya watumiaji inaboresha matokeo ya kutangaza kwa zaidi ya asilimia 6 kwenye kiwango cha wastani wa F1. Kwa hiyo, gazeti letu linatoa ushahidi wa uhakika wa kutajirisha makampuni ya asili kwa muda mrefu na tabia za watumiaji na kuhamisha masomo yanayojifunza kutoka kwa watumiaji wanaohusisha na matukio maalum.', 'az': "Bu kağıt, EPUTION adlı tərzimizi, SemEval-2018 İkinci Görevi 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction üçün açıq sınağımızı təsdiq edir. Bu işin sosyal media istifadəsində - daha doğrudan, Twitter - mümkün olaraq twet'in ən mümkün emoji ilə tədbir etmək məqsədilə bağlıdır. Bu metin klasifikasyonu problemimizin çətinlikləri istifadəçilərin tweyting tarihinə dayanan klasifikasyonu uygulamaq üçün transfer öyrənməsi fikrini keşfetir. Bizim təcrübələrimiz istifadəçilərimizin uyğunlaşdırma metodumunun makro ortalaması F1 üzerində 6%-dən artıq nəticəsini daha yaxşılaşdırır. Beləliklə, kağıdı istifadəçilərdən öyrənmiş dərsələri müəyyən vaxtlara göndərmək üçün orijinal korpusu uzun müddətlə istifadəçi davranışları ilə bərabər saxlamaq üçün dəlillər verir.", 'bn': "এই পত্রিকা আমাদের পদক্ষেপের ব্যাখ্যা করেছে, যার নাম ইপুটিশন, সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজের খোলা বিচারের জন্য, মাল্টিভাষায় ইমোজি প্ এই কাজ সম্পর্কে সামাজিক মিডিয়া ব্যবহার করার সাথে সম্পর্কিত - আরো পরিস্কার, টুইটার- এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে টুইটের সবচেয়ে সম্ভাব্য যে  Our solution for this text classification problem explores the idea of transfer learning for adapting the classifier based on users' tweeting history.  আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ব্যবহারকারী আড্ডেপশন পদ্ধতি ম্যাক্রোর গড়ে এফ১-এ ৬ শতাংশের বেশী ক্লাসিফেশন তাই আমাদের পত্রিকা প্রমাণ প্রদান করেছে যে মূল কোর্পাস ব্যবহারকারীদের আচরণ দীর্ঘদিন সমৃদ্ধ করার যৌক্তিকতার জন্য প্রমাণ প্রদান করা হয় এবং সংশ্", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSemEval-2018 ስራ 2፣ የብዙ ቋንቋ ኢዮጂ አፍሪካ ለመክፈት የተባለውን የEPUTION ሥርዓታችንን ይናገራል፡፡ ስራው ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ - በትዊተር እና በትዊተር - በተቃውሞው የሀይማዊ ተቃውሞ የሚታወቅበት የቻልሞው የኢትዮጵያውያን አሳውቀው ለማስታወቂያ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ጽሑፍ መግለጫ መፍትሕታችን በተጠቃሚ ትዊተር ታሪክ በመሠረት የመለስ ትምህርት ማድረጊያውን ለማቀናቀል ይፈልጋል፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የጠቃሚ አቀማመጥ ሥርዓት የግል ፍሬዎችን በማክሮው በመቶ 6 በመቶ የበለጠ ነው፡፡ Thus, our paper provides evidence for the rationality of enriching the original corpus longitudinally with user behaviors and transferring the lessons learned from corresponding users to specific instances.', 'ca': "This paper describes our approach, called EPUTION, for the open trial of the SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  La tasca està relacionada amb l'ús dels mitjans socials - més precisament, Twitter - amb el seu objectiu de predir els emoji més probablement associats d'un tweet. La nostra solució per aquest problema de classificació de textos explora la idea d'aprenentatge de transfer ència per adaptar el classificador basat en la història de tweets dels usuaris. Els nostres experiments demostren que el nostre mètode d'adaptació a l'usuari millora els resultats de classificació en més del 6% en la mitjana de F1. Així doncs, el nostre paper proporciona evidències per a la racionalitat d'enriquecer el corpus original longitudinalment amb comportaments d'usuari i transferir les lliçons aprengutes dels usuaris correspondents a exemples específics.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš přístup EPUTION pro otevřenou zkoušku SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Úkol se týká využívání sociálních médií přesněji Twitteru a jeho cílem je předpovědět nejpravděpodobnější související emoji tweetu. Naše řešení tohoto problému klasifikace textů zkoumá myšlenku transferového učení pro přizpůsobení klasifikátoru na základě historie tweetování uživatelů. Naše experimenty ukazují, že naše uživatelská adaptační metoda zlepšuje výsledky klasifikace o více než šest procent na makro-průměrném F1. Náš článek tak poskytuje důkazy o racionalitě obohacení původního korpusu podélně o uživatelské chování a přenášení poznatků získaných od odpovídajících uživatelů do konkrétních instancí.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse meie lähenemisviisi nimega EPUTION SemEval- 2018 ülesande 2, mitmekeelse emoji prognoosi avatud katse jaoks. Ülesanne on seotud sotsiaalmeedia - täpsemalt Twitteri - kasutamisega, mille eesmärk on ennustada säutsu kõige tõenäolisemaid seotud emojisid. Meie lahendus selle teksti klassifitseerimise probleemile uurib siirdeõppe ideed klassifitseerija kohandamiseks kasutajate säutsutamise ajaloo põhjal. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et meie kasutaja kohandamise meetod parandab klassifitseerimistulemusi rohkem kui 6% võrra makrokeskmisel F1-l. Seega annab meie töö tõendeid algse korpuse pikisuunalise rikastamise otstarbekuse kohta kasutajate käitumisega ja vastavatelt kasutajatelt saadud õppetundide edastamise kohta konkreetsetele juhtudele.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons toegang, genoem EPUTION, vir die oop veroorsoek van die SemEval- 2018 Taak 2, Multilingual Emoji voorsoek. Die taak verbind met die gebruik van sosiale media - meer presies, Twitter - met sy doel om die mees waarskynlik geassosieerde emoji van 'n tweet te voorskou. Ons oplossing vir hierdie teks klassifikasie probleem ondersoek die idee van oordrag leer vir aanpassing van die klassifiseerder gebaseer op gebruikers se tweeting geskiedenis. Ons eksperimente vertoon dat ons gebruiker-aanpassing metode klassifikasie resultate verbeter deur meer as 6 prosent op die makro-gemiddelde F1. Daarom, ons papier verskaf getuienis vir die rationaliteit van die oorspronklike korpus verryk met gebruikergedragte en die geleenthede wat geleer het van ooreenstemmende gebruikers na spesifieke geval.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan lähestymistapaamme nimeltä EPUTION SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Ennuste -ohjelman avoimeen kokeiluun. Tehtävä liittyy sosiaalisen median - tarkemmin sanottuna Twitterin - käyttämiseen, jonka tavoitteena on ennustaa twiitin todennäköisimmin liittyvä emoji. Ratkaisumme tähän tekstiluokitteluongelmaan tutkii ajatusta siirtooppimisesta luokittelijan mukauttamiseksi käyttäjien twiittaushistorian perusteella. Kokeemme osoittavat, että käyttäjäsopeutumismenetelmämme parantaa luokitustuloksia yli 6 prosenttia makrokeskiarvolla F1. Näin ollen artikkelimme osoittaa, että alkuperäisen korpusen rikastaminen pituussuuntaisesti käyttäjien käyttäytymisellä on järkevää ja vastaavien käyttäjien oppimien kokemusten siirtäminen tiettyihin tapauksiin.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր մոտեցումը, որը կոչվում է "Եպուցիոն", 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԵվալ" 2-ի բաց փորձարկումների համար, բազմալեզու էմոյի կանխատեսումը: Այս խնդիրը կապված է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների օգտագործման հետ, ավելի ճշգրիտ, Թվիթերի նպատակով, որպեսզի կանխատեսի թվիթերի ամենահավանական կապված էմոզիները: Այս տեքստի դասակարգման խնդրի լուծումը ուսումնասիրում է դասակարգման փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության գաղափարը, որը հիմնված է օգտագործողների թվիթերի պատմության վրա: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր օգտագործողի-ադապտացիայի մեթոդը բարելավում է դասակարգման արդյունքները ավելի քան 6 տոկոսով մակրոմիջին F1-ի վրա: Thus, our paper provides evidence for the rationality of enriching the original corpus longitudinally with user behaviors and transferring the lessons learned from corresponding users to specific instances.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup, zove se EPUTION, za otvoreno suđenje zadatka 2. polovine - 2018, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Taj zadatak se odnosi na upotrebu društvenih medija - tačnije, Twitter - sa ciljem predviđati najvjerojatnije povezanije emoji tweet a. Naše rješenje za ovaj problem sa klasifikacijom teksta istražuje ideju učenja prijenosa za prilagodbu klasifikatora na temelju povijesti tweeta korisnika. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš metod prilagodbe korisnika poboljšava rezultate klasifikacije više od 6 posto na makro-prosječnom F1. Stoga, naš papir pruža dokaze o racionalnosti bogatstva originalnog korpusa dužinski sa ponašanjem korisnika i prebacivanjem lekcija naučenih od odgovarajućih korisnika na određene slučajeve.', 'he': "העיתון הזה מתאר את הגישה שלנו, שנקראת EPUTION, למשפט הפתוח של SemEval-2018 משימה 2, חזיון Emoji רבולוגי. המשימה קשורה לשימוש בתקשורת חברתית - בדיוק יותר, טוויטר - עם מטרתו לחזות את האמוג'י הכי סביר שקשור לטוויט. הפתרון שלנו לבעיית ההקליזציה הטקסטית הזו חוקר את הרעיון של לימוד העברה כדי להסתגל למקליזציה המבוססת על היסטוריה של השתמשים בטיוויט. הניסויים שלנו מראים ששיטת ההסתגלות המשתמשת שלנו משפר את תוצאות ההקלטה על יותר מ-6 אחוזים על F1 הממוצע המקרו. כך, העיתון שלנו מספק ראיות לרציונליות של העשיר של הקורפוס המקורי באופן ארוך עם התנהגות משתמשים ומעביר את השיעורים שנלמדו מהמשתמשים המתאימים למקרים מסוימים.", 'ha': "Wannan karatun yana bayyana hanyarmu, kallo EPUTIon, dõmin the buɗe jarrabar bayani na Semeval-2018 Tafiyar 2, multilinguin Emoji Prediction. Kayan aiki yana da amfani da mitandai da jamii - kafin da inganci, Twitter - na yi amfani da shi dõmin ya yi bayani ga hisoyi masu yiwuwa mafi kusa da ana haɗa shi na Twitter. Cikakcinmu ga wannan matsayin mai classified na gane zato ya sami shirin motsi da za'a sami tsarin mai daraja a kan historin mai amfani da shi. Kayan jarrabayenmu na nũna cewa metoden da za'a ƙara fassarar fasarin mai amfani da shi, ko da 6%, a kan makro-kawaici F1. Kayan haka, karatunmu yana da shaidar ta zama halanci ga rikitarwa na kure na farko da aikin mai amfani da shi daidai na sami musanya wa'anar da aka sanar daga masu inganci zuwa misali masu ƙayyade.", 'jv': "Perintah iki rambarang nggawe dadi, jeneng epUTion (ENGKANYO), nggawe paten kang ibukak kebebasan seminval- 2008 task 2, Multilanguage emuji predikion. Nambah punika luwih nggambar media sothik - akeh liyane, Google - kanggo njaluk dadi iki dadi supoyo awak dhéwé éntuk kebutaan e tiket sing apik dhéwé. Genjer Where's the reference? Saiki, awak dhéwé nggawe perintah kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe nguasai perusahaan anyar tentang karo hal-awak dhéwé, ngono njaluké awak dhéwé ngerasai perusahaan winih sing isiné karo pawaran nganggep kuwi kesempatan.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš pristop, imenovan EPUTION, za odprto preskušanje SemEval- 2018 Task 2, Večjezična napoved emojev. Naloga se nanaša na uporabo družbenih omrežij - natančneje Twitterja - s ciljem napovedati najverjetnejši povezani emoji tweeta. Naša rešitev za ta problem klasifikacije besedila raziskuje idejo transfernega učenja za prilagajanje klasifikatorja na podlagi zgodovine tvitanja uporabnikov. Naši poskusi kažejo, da naša metoda prilagajanja uporabnikom izboljša rezultate klasifikacije za več kot 6 odstotkov pri makropovprečju F1. Tako naš prispevek dokazuje racionalnost obogatitve izvirnega korpusa vzdolžno z vedenjem uporabnikov in prenosa izkušenj, pridobljenih od ustreznih uporabnikov v določene primere.', 'bo': 'ཤོག བྱ་འགུལ་འདིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་དང་། དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་ཡང་ཌིས་ཌིར་ཐོག་ཏེ། ང་ཚོའི་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ ང་ཚོའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་སྟངས་གྱིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གྲོས་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་མི་སྡེ་རིམ་ཨང་གི་ནང་ལས་ ༦་ལས་བརྒྱ་ཆ་མཐོང དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བྱང་གིས་ཐོག་མའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པ་ལ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དང་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་གནད་དོན'}
{'en': 'PickleTeam ! at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : English and Spanish Emoji Prediction from Tweets', 'ar': 'مخلل! في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية باللغتين الإنجليزية والإسبانية من التغريدات', 'fr': "L'équipe Pickle\xa0! à SemeVal-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Prédiction des emoji en anglais et en espagnol à partir de Tweets", 'es': '¡Equipo PickleTeam! en SemEval-2018 Tarea 2: Predicción de emojis en inglés y español a partir de tweets', 'pt': 'Equipe Pickle! na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Previsão de emojis em inglês e espanhol a partir de tweets', 'ja': 'PickleTeam! at SemEval -2018 Task 2: Tweetsからの英語とスペイン語の絵文字予測', 'zh': '泡菜队! 在SemEval-2018务2:推文之英语西班牙语表情符号占', 'hi': 'अचारटीम! SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर: Tweets से अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश इमोजी भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'PickleTeam! на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Прогноз эмодзи на английском и испанском языках из твитов', 'ga': 'Foireann Pickle! ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Béarla agus Spáinnis Emoji Prediction ó Tweets', 'el': 'Ομάδα Πίκλε! Καθήκον 2: Αγγλικά και Ισπανικά Προβλέψεις από τα Τουίτ', 'kk': 'Таңдау тобы! Ағылшын және Испан эмози тапсырмасының 2- тапсырмасында', 'ka': 'რთო! SemEval-2018 დავალებით 2: ანგლისური და სპანელი ემოჯიის წინასწორება Tweets-დან', 'hu': 'PickleTeam! A SemEval-2018 feladat 2: angol és spanyol emoji jóslás tweetekből', 'lt': 'PickleTeam! SemEval-2018 2 užduotis: anglų ir ispanų Emoji Prediction from Tweets', 'ms': 'Pasukan Pickle! di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Prediksi Emoji Bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol dari Tweets', 'it': 'PickleTeam! Task 2 di SemEval-2018: Predizione Emoji inglese e spagnolo dai Tweet', 'ml': 'പിക്കല്\u200d ടീം! സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷ് എമോജിയും ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും', 'no': 'Velkomma! ved halvEval-2018 oppgåve 2: engelsk og spansk Emoji-forordning frå tweets', 'mk': 'Тим! на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Предвидување на англиски и шпански емои од Твитови', 'ro': 'PickleTeam! SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Predicția emoțiilor engleză și spaniolă din Tweets', 'mt': 'PickleTeam! f’SemEval-2018 Task 2: English and Spanish Emoji Prediction from Tweets', 'mn': 'Хоосон баг! SemEval-2018 Task 2: English and Spanish Emoji Prediction from Tweets', 'sr': 'Pikletim! na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: predviđanje engleskog i španjolskog Emojija iz Tweets-a', 'so': 'PickleTeam! Shaqada SemEval-2018 2: Ingiriis iyo Isbanish Emoji Prediction from Twitter', 'pl': 'Zespół PickleTeam! Zadanie 2: Prognoza Emoji w języku angielskim i hiszpańskim z Tweetów', 'ur': 'PickleTeam! سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس ۲: انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی ایموجی پیش بینی ٹویٹ سے', 'si': 'පික්ල් කණ්ඩායම්! සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩේ 2: ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධානය', 'sv': 'PickleTeam! på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Engelska och Spanska Emoji Prediction från Tweets', 'ta': 'பிக்கல் அணி! செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 2: ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் எமோயி முன்னுரிமை', 'uz': 'PickleTeam! at SemEval-2018 Task 2: English and Spanish Emoji Prediction from Tweets', 'vi': 'Dưa-ngâm! ở SemEvl-208 Task 2: quân đội Anh và Tây Ban Nha Emoji dự đoán từ Tweet', 'nl': 'PickleTeam. Taak 2: Engels en Spaans Emoji Voorspelling vanuit Tweets', 'hr': 'PickleTeam! na zadatku 2: engleska i španjolska predstava Emoji iz Tweets-a', 'da': 'PickleTeam! på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Engelsk og spansk Emoji Forudsigelse fra Tweets', 'de': 'PickleTeam! Aufgabe 2: Englische und Spanische Emoji-Vorhersage aus Tweets', 'id': 'Tim Pickle! di SemEval-2018 Task 2: English and Spanish Emoji Prediction from Tweets', 'ko': '팀!SemEval-18 미션2: 트위터의 영어와 스페인어 표정 예측', 'bg': 'Пикълтим! Задача 2: Прогнозиране на английски и испански емоджи от туитове', 'fa': 'تيم "پيکل"! در وظیفه ۲۰۱۸: پیشنهاد ایموزی انگلیسی و اسپانیایی از Tweets', 'sw': 'PickleTeam! katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 2: Udhibiti wa Kiingereza na Kihispania Emoji kutoka kwenye twita', 'tr': 'Baglançy at SemEval-2018 Görev 2: Iňlisçe we Ispanýolça Emoji Taýýarlaryndan Taýýarlar', 'af': 'Kies Skep! by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Engels en Spaanse Emoji Voorskou van Tweets', 'sq': 'PickleTeam! në SemEval-2018 Task 2: English and Spanish Emoji Prediction from Tweets', 'am': 'PickleTeam!  ስራ 2', 'hy': "Պիկլե՛տ թիմ: 2-րդ հանձնարարությունը' Անգլերենի և Իսպանիայի Էմոյի նախատեսումը Tweetներից", 'az': 'PickleTeam! SemEval-2018 G칬revi 2: 캻ngilizce v톛 캻spanyol Emoji T칬vtl톛rind톛n T칬vrl톛rd톛n', 'bn': 'পিক্লেটিম! সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশ এমোজি প্রেকশন টুইট থেকে', 'bs': 'PickleTeam! na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: predviđanje engleskog i španjolskog Emojija iz Tweets-a', 'cs': 'PickleTeam! Úkol 2: Předpověď emoji v angličtině a španělštině z tweetů', 'ca': 'PickleTeam! a SemEval-2018 Task 2: English and Spanish Emoji Prediction from Tweets', 'et': 'PickleTeam! SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: inglise ja hispaania emoji prognoos tweets', 'fi': 'PickleTeam! SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Englannin ja Espanjan Emoji Ennuste Tweeteistä', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_string Nang semebal-2008 task 2: Inggris lan Spanish emuji Kemerdekaan Mulai', 'ha': 'Team! at SemEal-2018 Task 2: English and spanish Emoji Prediction from Twitter', 'sk': 'PickleTeam! Na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: napoved angleških in španskih emojev iz tweets', 'he': 'צוות פיקל! ב SemEval-2018 משימה 2: תקיפת אמואי אנגלית וספרדית מטוויטים', 'bo': 'ཁ་ཡིག་གླེང་མོལ། ཨིན་ཇིའི་ལྷན་ཁང་གི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་༢༠་ཅན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་བཤད་པ། ཨིན་ཇིའི་དང་སིར་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཨིན་ཇོ་ཇི་ལ'}
{'en': 'We present a system for emoji prediction on English and Spanish tweets, prepared for the SemEval-2018 task on Multilingual Emoji Prediction. We compared the performance of an SVM, LSTM and an ensemble of these two. We found the SVM performed best on our development set with an accuracy of 61.3 % for English and 83 % for Spanish. The features used for the SVM are lowercased word n-grams in the range of 1 to 20, tokenised by a TweetTokenizer and stripped of stop words. On the test set, our model achieved an accuracy of 34 % on English, with a slightly lower score of 29.7 % accuracy on Spanish.', 'ar': 'نقدم نظامًا للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية على التغريدات باللغتين الإنجليزية والإسبانية ، مُعدًا لمهمة SemEval-2018 حول توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات. قارنا أداء SVM و LSTM ومجموعة من هذين الجهازين. وجدنا أن SVM كان يؤدي بشكل أفضل في مجموعة التطوير الخاصة بنا بدقة 61.3٪ للغة الإنجليزية و 83٪ للإسبانية. الميزات المستخدمة لـ SVM عبارة عن كلمة n-grams ذات أحرف صغيرة تتراوح من 1 إلى 20 ، تم ترميزها بواسطة TweetTokenizer وتجريدها من كلمات التوقف. في مجموعة الاختبار ، حقق نموذجنا دقة بلغت 34٪ في اللغة الإنجليزية ، مع درجة أقل قليلاً بلغت 29.7٪ في اللغة الإسبانية.', 'es': 'Presentamos un sistema de predicción de emojis en tuits en inglés y español, preparado para la tarea Semeval-2018 sobre Predicción multilingüe de emojis. Comparamos el rendimiento de un SVM, LSTM y un conjunto de estos dos. Descubrimos que el SVM tuvo el mejor rendimiento en nuestro conjunto de desarrollo con una precisión del 61,3% para el inglés y del 83% para el español. Las características utilizadas para el SVM son n-gramas de palabras en minúscula en el rango de 1 a 20, tokenizados por un TweetTokenizer y despojados de palabras vacías. En el conjunto de pruebas, nuestro modelo logró una precisión del 34% en inglés, con una puntuación ligeramente inferior del 29,7% en español.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un système de prédiction d'emoji sur les tweets en anglais et en espagnol, préparé pour la tâche SemeVal-2018 sur la prédiction multilingue des emoji. Nous avons comparé les performances d'une SVM, d'une LSTM et d'un ensemble de ces deux éléments. Nous avons constaté que la SVM fonctionnait le mieux sur notre ensemble de développement avec une précision de 61,3\xa0% pour l'anglais et 83\xa0% pour l'espagnol. Les fonctionnalités utilisées pour la SVM sont des n-grammes de mots en minuscules compris entre 1 et 20, tokenisés par un TweetTokenizer et débarrassés des mots vides. Sur le plateau de test, notre modèle a atteint une précision de 34\xa0% en anglais, avec un score légèrement inférieur de 29,7\xa0% en espagnol.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um sistema para previsão de emojis em tweets em inglês e espanhol, preparado para a tarefa SemEval-2018 de previsão de emojis multilíngues. Comparamos o desempenho de um SVM, LSTM e um conjunto desses dois. Descobrimos que o SVM teve o melhor desempenho em nosso conjunto de desenvolvimento com uma precisão de 61,3% para inglês e 83% para espanhol. Os recursos usados para o SVM são n-grams de palavras em minúsculas no intervalo de 1 a 20, tokenizados por um TweetTokenizer e sem palavras de parada. No conjunto de teste, nosso modelo alcançou uma precisão de 34% em inglês, com uma pontuação ligeiramente inferior de 29,7% de precisão em espanhol.', 'ja': '多言語絵文字予測に関するSemEval -2018タスクのために用意された、英語とスペイン語のツイートの絵文字予測システムをご紹介します。SVM、LSTM、これら2つのアンサンブルのパフォーマンスを比較しました。SVMは、英語では61.3%、スペイン語では83%の精度で開発セットで最高のパフォーマンスを発揮しました。SVMに使用される機能は、1 ～ 20の範囲の小文字の単語nグラムであり、TweetTokenizerによってトークン化され、停止単語が削除されます。テストセットでは、私たちのモデルは英語で34 ％の精度を達成し、スペイン語では29.7 ％のわずかに低いスコアでした。', 'hi': 'हम अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश ट्वीट्स पर इमोजी भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक प्रणाली पेश करते हैं, जो बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी पर SemEval-2018 कार्य के लिए तैयार है। हमने एक एसवीएम, एलएसटीएम और इन दोनों के एक पहनावे के प्रदर्शन की तुलना की। हमने पाया कि एसवीएम ने अंग्रेजी के लिए 61.3% और स्पेनिश के लिए 83% की सटीकता के साथ हमारे विकास सेट पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन किया। एसवीएम के लिए उपयोग की जाने वाली विशेषताएं 1 से 20 की सीमा में कम उम्र के शब्द एन-ग्राम हैं, जो एक TweetTokenizer द्वारा टोकन किए गए हैं और स्टॉप शब्दों से छीन लिए गए हैं। परीक्षण सेट पर, हमारे मॉडल ने स्पेनिश पर 29.7% सटीकता के थोड़े कम स्कोर के साथ अंग्रेजी पर 34% की सटीकता हासिल की।', 'zh': '发一于英语西班牙语推文之表情符号,为SemEval-2018多言表情符号占事之备。 吾校SVM,LSTM与二者之性也。 吾见 SVM 于吾集上为上,英语之准确率为 61.3%,西班牙语之准确率为 83%。 SVM 者,介于 1 20 之间小书单词 n 元语法, TweetTokenizer 记而去停用词。 试集上,吾形于英语之准确率为34%,西班牙语之准确率略低,为29.7%。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем систему прогнозирования эмодзи на английском и испанском твитах, подготовленную для задачи SemEval-2018 по многоязычному прогнозированию эмодзи. Мы сравнили производительность SVM, LSTM и ансамбля из этих двух. Мы обнаружили, что виртуальная машина защиты работает лучше всего на нашем наборе разработок с точностью 61,3% для английского и 83% для испанского языков. Для виртуальной машины защиты используются строчные n-граммы слов в диапазоне от 1 до 20, токенизированные TweetTokenizer и удаленные из стоп-слов. На тестовом наборе наша модель достигла точности 34% на английском языке, с немного более низкой оценкой 29,7% на испанском языке.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair córas le haghaidh tuar emoji ar tweets Béarla agus Spáinnis, ullmhaithe do thasc SemEval-2018 ar Ilteangach Emoji Prediction. Rinneamar comparáid idir feidhmíocht SVM, LSTM agus ensemble den dá cheann seo. Fuaireamar amach gurbh fhearr a d’fheidhmigh an SVM ar ár dtacar forbartha le cruinneas 61.3% don Bhéarla agus 83% don Spáinnis. Is iad na gnéithe a úsáidtear don SVM ná focail cháis íochtair sa raon 1 go 20, comharthaithe ag TweetTokenizer agus stopfhocail a scriosadh. Ar an tacar tástála, bhain ár múnla cruinneas 34% amach ar an mBéarla, le scór beagán níos ísle de chruinneas 29.7% ar an Spáinnis.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამოჯია წარმოდგენების სისტემა ინგლისური და სპანელი ტივიტების შესახებ, რომელიც SemEval-2018 სამუშაო მრავალური ემოჯია წარმოდგენების შესახებ დავწყებ ჩვენ SVM, LSTM და ამ ორივეს ანსენბლის გამოსახულებას შემდგენეთ. ჩვენ მივიღეთ, რომ SVM ჩვენი განვითარებაში უკეთესი გავაკეთება 61,3% ინგლისური და 83% სპანელი. Name ჩვენი მოდელი ინგლისურად 34%-ის წარმოდგენა, რომელიც 29.7%-ის წარმოდგენა.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα πρόβλεψης σε Αγγλικά και Ισπανικά tweets, προετοιμασμένο για την εργασία με θέμα την Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη εμόζι. Συγκρίναμε την απόδοση ενός SVM, LSTM και ενός συνόλου αυτών των δύο. Βρήκαμε ότι η SVM αποδίδει καλύτερα στο σετ ανάπτυξης μας με ακρίβεια 61,3% για τα αγγλικά και 83% για τα ισπανικά. Τα χαρακτηριστικά που χρησιμοποιούνται για το SVM είναι μικρά γράμματα λέξεων ν-γραμμάτων στην περιοχή από 1 έως 20, επισημαίνονται από ένα TweetTokenizer και αφαιρούνται από λέξεις stop. Στο σετ δοκιμής, το μοντέλο μας πέτυχε ακρίβεια 34% στα αγγλικά, με ελαφρώς χαμηλότερη βαθμολογία της ακρίβειας 29,7% στα ισπανικά.', 'it': "Presentiamo un sistema di predizione emoji su tweet inglese e spagnolo, preparato per il compito SemEval-2018 sulla predizione emoji multilingue. Abbiamo confrontato le prestazioni di un SVM, LSTM e un ensemble di questi due. Abbiamo trovato che l'SVM ha funzionato meglio sul nostro set di sviluppo con una precisione del 61,3% per l'inglese e dell'83% per lo spagnolo. Le caratteristiche utilizzate per l'SVM sono minuscole parole n-grammi nell'intervallo da 1 a 20, tokenizzate da un TweetTokenizer e prive di stop words. Sul set di test, il nostro modello ha raggiunto un'accuratezza del 34% sull'inglese, con un punteggio leggermente inferiore del 29,7% su quello spagnolo.", 'kk': 'Біз ағылшын және испан тілдерінің ағылшын тілдерінің бірнеше тілдерінің алдындағы half Eval-2018 тапсырмасына дайындалған эмодж тапсырмасын таңдаймыз. Біз SVM, LSTM және осы екеуінің енсембулын салыстырдық. Біз SVM бағдарламасында 61,3% ағылшын тілінде және 83% испан тілінде жақсы жұмыс істеді. SVM үшін қолданылатын мүмкіндіктері 1- 20 аралығында n- грамм сөзді кішірейтіп, TweetTokenizer- мен белгілеген, тоқтату сөздері алып тастайды. Сынақтар жиынында, біздің үлгіміз ағылшын тілінде 34% деген дұрыс жеткізді, испан тілінде 29,7% деген дұрыс.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az angol és spanyol tweeteken elérhető emoji jóslási rendszert, amely a SemEval-2018 többnyelvű emoji jóslásról szóló feladatra készült. Összehasonlítottuk egy SVM, LSTM és egy együttes teljesítményét. Azt találtuk, hogy az SVM a legjobban teljesített fejlesztési készletünkön 61,3%-os pontossággal angolul és 83%-os spanyolul. Az SVM-hez használt funkciók kisbetűs n-gramm szó 1-20 tartományban, tokenizált TweetTokenizer és stop szavaktól eltávolított. A tesztkészleten modellünk 34%-os pontosságot ért el angolul, valamivel alacsonyabb pontszámot, 29,7%-os pontosságot ért el spanyolul.', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളിലും ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ഇംഗ്ലീഷും പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം നാം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d- ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു SVM, LSTM പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തെയും ഈ രണ്ടുപേരുടെയും പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തെയും തുല്യമാക്കി. എസ്\u200cവിഎം നമ്മുടെ വികസിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ലത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d 61 എസ്\u200cവിഎം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d 1 മുതല്\u200d 20 വരെ വാക്ക് n- ഗ്രാമില്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്നു ടെസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d 34% കൃത്യമായി എത്തി. സ്പാനിഷില്\u200d 29.7% കൂടുതല്\u200d കുറച്ച് താഴ്ന്ന സ്കോര്\u200d', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome emodžių prognozių sistemą anglų ir ispanų tweetuose, parengtą SemEval-2018 uždaviniui dėl daugiakalbės emodžių prognozės. Palyginome SVM, LSTM ir šių dviejų kompleksų rezultatus. Mes nustatėme, kad SVM geriausiai atliko savo vystymosi rinkinį, tiksliai 61,3 % anglų ir 83 % ispanų. SVM naudojami požymiai yra mažesnis žodis n-gramai nuo 1 iki 20, pažymėtas TweetTokenizer ir pašalintas sustojimo žodžiais. On the test set, our model achieved an accuracy of 34% on English, with a slightly lower score of 29.7% accuracy on Spanish.', 'mk': 'Презентираме систем за предвидување на емоџи на англиски и шпански твитови, подготвен за задачата SemEval-2018 на Мултијазичната предвидување на емоџи. Ги споредивме изведувањата на СВМ, ЛСТМ и ансемблот на овие двајца. We found the SVM performed best on our development set with an accuracy of 61.3% for English and 83% for Spanish.  Функционите кои се користат за SVM се мали зборови n-грами во периодот од 1 до 20, означени од Твит Токенизер и отстранети од запирачки зборови. На тестот, нашиот модел постигна точност од 34 отсто на англиски, со малку пониска точност од 29,7 отсто на шпански.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan sistem untuk ramalan emoji pada tweet Bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol, disediakan untuk tugas SemEval-2018 dalam ramalan Emoji Berbahasa. Kami membandingkan prestasi SVM, LSTM dan ensemble kedua-dua ini. Kami jumpa SVM yang terbaik dalam pembangunan kami ditetapkan dengan ketepatan 61.3% untuk bahasa Inggeris dan 83% untuk bahasa Sepanyol. Ciri-ciri yang digunakan untuk SVM adalah perkataan n-gram kecil dalam julat 1 hingga 20, ditandakan oleh TweetTokenizer dan dibuang perkataan henti. Pada set ujian, model kami mencapai ketepatan 34% pada bahasa Inggeris, dengan skor sedikit lebih rendah 29.7% pada bahasa Sepanyol.', 'mn': 'Бид Англи болон Испанийн tweets дээр эмоджийн таамаглалтын системийг илэрхийлдэг. Олон хэл Эмози хэлний таамаглалтын талаар SemEval-2018 даалгаварын төлөө бэлэн. Бид SVM, LSTM болон эдгээр хоёр тооны үзүүлэлтийг харьцуулсан. Бид SVM-ийн хөгжлийн хэмжээнд хамгийн сайн ажиллаж байгааг олж мэдсэн. Англи хэл болон Испанийн 83 хувь нь 61.3 хувь нь зөв байдаг. SVM-д хэрэглэгдсэн өөрчлөлт нь 1-20 хүртэл n-грамм хэмжээнд бага хэмжээний үг, TweetTokenizer-ээс тодорхойлж, зогсоох үгнүүд юм. Тест хэмжээнд бидний загвар Англи хэлний 34%-ын тодорхойлолтой болсон. Ингэснээр 29.7% нь бага тодорхойлолтой.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw sistema għal tbassir emoji fuq tweets bl-Ingliż u Spanjol, imħejjija għall-kompitu SemEval-2018 dwar tbassir Emoji Multilingwi. Qabbelna l-prestazzjoni ta’ SVM, LSTM u ensemble ta’ dawn it-tnejn. We found the SVM performed best on our development set with an accuracy of 61.3% for English and 83% for Spanish.  Il-karatteristiċi użati għall-SVM huma kliem n-grammi b’ittri baxxi fil-medda ta’ 1 sa 20, immarkati minn TweetTokenizer u mneħħija mill-kliem stop. Fuq is-sett tat-test, il-mudell tagħna kiseb preċiżjoni ta’ 34% fuq l-Ingliż, b’punteġġ kemmxejn aktar baxx ta’ 29.7% fuq l-Ispanjol.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit system for emoji-forhåndsvising på engelsk og spansk tweet, forberedt for semiEval-2018-oppgåva om fleirspråk Emoji-forhåndsvising. Vi samanlikna utviklinga av ein SVM, LSTM og ein ensembel av desse to. Vi fann at SVM utførte best på utviklinga vårt med en nøyaktig 61,3% for engelsk og 83% for spansk. @ info På testsettet fikk modellen vårt nøyaktig 34% på engelsk, med litt nedre poeng med 29,7% nøyaktig på spansk.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo sistem za predviđanje emoji na engleskim i španjolskim tweetima, pripremljen za posao semiEval-2018 o višejezičkoj Emoji predviđanju. Usporedili smo izvedbu SVM, LSTM i ensemble ove dve. Pronašli smo da je SVM najbolje izvršio na našoj razvojnoj seti sa preciznošću 61,3% za engleski i 83% za španjolski. Običnosti koje se koriste za SVM su smanjene riječi n-grame u rasponu od 1 do 20, koje je pokazala TweetTokenizer i skinula prestanačne riječi. Na testu, naš model je postigao tačnost od 34% na engleskom jeziku, sa malo manjim rezultatom od 29,7% tačnosti na španjolskom jeziku.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy system przewidywania emoji na angielskich i hiszpańskich tweetach, przygotowany do zadania SemEval-2018 na temat Wielojęzycznej Prognozy Emoji. Porównaliśmy występ SVM, LSTM i zespołu tych dwóch. Stwierdziliśmy, że SVM sprawdził się najlepiej w naszym zestawie rozwojowym z dokładnością 61,3% dla angielskiego i 83% dla hiszpańskiego. Funkcje używane w SVM to małe n-gramy słów w zakresie od 1 do 20, tokenizowane przez TweetTokenizer i pozbawione słów stop. Na zestawie testowym nasz model osiągnął dokładność 34% w języku angielskim, z nieco niższym wynikiem dokładności 29,7% w języku hiszpańskim.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa nidaam la sii sheegayo afka Ingiriiska iyo Isbanishka, taasoo loo diyaariyey shaqada SemEval-2018 oo ku saabsan horumarinta luuqadaha badan ee Emoji. Waxaynu isbarbardhignay sameynta SVM, LSTM iyo tusaale labadan. Waxaynu helnay SVM oo si wanaagsan u sameeyay horumarinimadeeda si saxda ah 61.3% Ingiriis iyo 83% Isbanish. Xiriikhda SVM waxaa lagu isticmaalaa hadal n-gram oo ku qoran jaranjarka 1-20, kaasoo lagu calaamadeeyey TweetTokeniser oo laga qaaday hadal joojinta ah. Isbanishka waxaa ku soo bandhigay imtixaankayada qiyaastii 34% oo afka Ingiriiska ku qoran, waxayna isbanishka ku heleen qiimo yar oo qiyaas ah 29.7% sax ah.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un sistem de predicție emoji pe tweeturile în limba engleză și spaniolă, pregătit pentru sarcina SemEval-2018 privind predicția emoji multilingvă. Am comparat performanțele unui SVM, LSTM și un ansamblu din aceste două. Am constatat că SVM a rezultat cel mai bine pe setul nostru de dezvoltare cu o precizie de 61,3% pentru engleză și 83% pentru spaniolă. Caracteristicile utilizate pentru SVM sunt cuvântul n-grame cu litere mici între 1 și 20, tokenizate de un TweetTokenizer și lipsite de cuvinte stop. Pe setul de teste, modelul nostru a obținut o precizie de 34% pe limba engleză, cu un scor ușor mai mic de 29,7% pe limba spaniolă.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் tweets மீது emoji முன்வார்த்தல் அமைப்பை காண்பிக்கிறோம், பல மொழி எமோஜி முன்னேற்றத்தில் செம் நாம் ஒரு SVM, LSTM மற்றும் இவ்விரண்டின் ஒரு ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். எஸ்விஎம் எங்கள் முன்னேற்றத்தில் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டதை நாங்கள் கண்டுபிடித்தோம் ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு சரியாக 61.3 SVM பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட பண்புகள் 1-20 விளிம்பில் குறைந்த வார்த்தை n- grams, குறைந்தது, ஒரு TweetTokenizer மற்றும் நிறுத்தும் வார்த்தைகளை அழித்தத சோதனையின் அமைப்பில், எங்கள் மாதிரி ஆங்கிலத்தில் 34% சரியான மதிப்பை பெற்றுவிட்டது, ஸ்பானிஷ் சரியில் 29.7% குறைந்த மதிப்ப', 'ur': 'ہم انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی ٹویٹ کے بارے میں emoji پیش بینی کے لئے ایک سیستم پیش بینی کریں، جو ملتی زبان ایموجی پیش بینی کے بارے میں سیم Eval-2018 کے لئے تیار کی گئی ہے. ہم نے ایک SVM, LSTM اور ان دونوں میں سے ایک انسبل کی عملکرد مقایسہ کی۔ ہم نے SVM کو اچھی طرح سے انگلیسی کے لئے 61.3% اور 83% اسپانیایی کے لئے پایا ہے۔ Name آزمائش سٹ پر، ہماری مدل انگلیسی پر 34% کی دقیق پہنچ گئی، اسپانیایی پر 29.7% دقیق تھوڑا کم اسکور کے ساتھ۔', 'si': 'අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිශ් ට්විට් වල එමෝජි විශ්වාස කරපු පද්ධතියක් පෙන්වන්නේ, සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩේ ගොඩක් භ අපි SVM, LSTM සහ මේ දෙන්නෙක්ගේ සංචාරයක් ගැන සැකසුම් කරනවා. අපිට හොයාගත්තා SVM එක අපේ විකාශයේ හොඳම ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කරලා ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාව සඳහා 61.3% තියෙන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය Name පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් එකේ අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ 34% සිද්ධතාවක් ලැබුණා, ස්පැනිස් වල 29.7% සිද්ධතාවක් ටිකක් අඩු', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett system för emoji förutsägelse på engelska och spanska tweets, förberett för SemEval-2018 uppgiften om flerspråkig emoji förutsägelse. Vi jämförde prestandan av en SVM, LSTM och en ensemble av dessa två. Vi fann att SVM presterade bäst på vårt utvecklingsset med en noggrannhet på 61,3% för engelska och 83% för spanska. Funktionerna som används för SVM är små bokstäver n-gram i intervallet 1 till 20, tokeniserade av en TweetTokenizer och borttagna stopord. På provuppsättningen uppnådde vår modell en noggrannhet på 34% på engelska, med en något lägre poäng på 29,7% noggrannhet på spanska.', 'uz': 'Biz ingliz va Ispanchadan foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchi tizimni hosil qilamiz, SemEval-2018 bir necha tillar Emoji Diqqat uchun tayyorlangan. We compared the performance of an SVM, LSTM and an ensemble of these two.  Biz SVM taʼminlovchimizda eng yaxshi narsa bajarishni topdik. Ingliz tilida 61.3% va 83% Ispanchaga ishlayotgan. Name Sinov sohasida, modelmiz ingliz tilida 34% aniqlanishga erishilgan, ispancha 29.7% aniqligidan biroz qisqa qisqacha foydalanadi.', 'vi': "Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống dự đoán đa dạng của tweet về tiếng Anh và Tây Ban Nha, chuẩn bị cho nhiệm vụ SemEvl-thẩm 8 về dự đoán đa ngôn ngữ Emoji. Chúng tôi đã so sánh hiệu ứng của một SVM, HTTM và một kết hợp của hai loại này. Chúng tôi tìm thấy SVM đã hoàn thành tốt nhất trong bộ phát triển của chúng tôi với độ chính xác 61.3='cho Anh-3=) for Spanish. Các tính n ăng dùng cho SVM là Từ n-grams nhỏ trong khoảng cách 1-20, bị bật bởi Tweet Tokenizer và không có từ dừng. Trên bộ thử nghiệm, người mẫu đạt độ chính xác 34=. trên tiếng Anh, với tỉ số 29.7=. chính xác trong môn Tây Ban Nha.", 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et system til emoji forudsigelse på engelske og spanske tweets, forberedt til SemEval-2018 opgaven om flersproget emoji forudsigelse. Vi sammenlignede præstationen af en SVM, LSTM og et ensemble af disse to. Vi fandt, at SVM fungerede bedst på vores udviklingssæt med en nøjagtighed på 61,3% for engelsk og 83% for spansk. De funktioner, der anvendes til SVM, er små bogstaver n-gram i intervallet 1 til 20, tokeniseret af en TweetTokenizer og fratrukket stopord. På testsættet opnåede vores model en nøjagtighed på 34% på engelsk, med en lidt lavere score på 29,7% på spansk.', 'bg': 'Представяме система за прогнозиране на емоджи на английски и испански туитове, подготвена за задачата за многоезично прогнозиране на емоджи. Сравнихме изпълнението на СВМ, ЛСТМ и ансамбъл от тези двама. Установихме, че най-добре се представя в нашия набор за разработки с точност 61.3% за английски и 83% за испански. Функциите, използвани за SVM, са малки букви думички в диапазона от 1 до 20, символизирани с ТуитTokenizer и лишени от стоп думи. На тестовия комплект нашият модел постигна точност от 34% на английски език, с малко по-ниска оценка от 29,7% на испански език.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een systeem voor emoji voorspelling op Engelse en Spaanse tweets, voorbereid op de SemEval-2018 taak op Meertalige Emoji voorspelling. We hebben de uitvoering van een SVM, LSTM en een ensemble van deze twee vergeleken. We vonden dat de SVM het beste presteerde op onze ontwikkelingsset met een nauwkeurigheid van 61,3% voor Engels en 83% voor Spaans. De functies die worden gebruikt voor de SVM zijn kleine letters n-grammen in het bereik van 1 tot 20, getekeniseerd door een TweetTokenizer en ontdaan van stopwoorden. Op de testset behaalde ons model een nauwkeurigheid van 34% op Engels, met een iets lagere score van 29,7% nauwkeurigheid op Spaans.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein System zur Emoji-Vorhersage auf englischen und spanischen Tweets, vorbereitet für die SemEval-2018 Aufgabe auf Mehrsprachige Emoji Vorhersage. Wir haben die Performance eines SVM, LSTM und eines Ensembles dieser beiden verglichen. Wir fanden, dass der SVM am besten in unserem Entwicklungsset mit einer Genauigkeit von 61,3% für Englisch und 83% für Spanisch abschneidet. Die Funktionen, die für die SVM verwendet werden, sind kleingeschriebene Wort n-Gramm im Bereich von 1 bis 20, tokenisiert durch einen TweetTokenizer und befreit von Stoppwörtern. Auf dem Testset erreichte unser Modell eine Genauigkeit von 34% auf Englisch, mit einer etwas geringeren Punktzahl von 29,7% Genauigkeit auf Spanisch.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo sustav za predviđanje emoji na engleskim i španjolskim tweetima, pripremljen za zadatak semiEval-2018 o višejezičkoj Emoji predviđanju. Usporedili smo izvršnost SVM, LSTM i ensemble ove dvije. Pronašli smo da je SVM najbolje izvršio na našoj razvojnoj seti sa preciznošću 61,3% za engleski i 83% za španjolski. Običnosti koje se koriste za SVM su smanjene riječi n-grama u rasponu od 1 do 20, koje se pokazuje TweetTokenizer i skidaju stanične riječi. Na testiranju, naš model je postigao tačnost 34% na engleskom jeziku, s malo nižim rezultatom od 29,7% tačnosti na španjolskom jeziku.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan sistem untuk prediksi emoji pada tweet Inggris dan Spanyol, siap untuk tugas SemEval-2018 pada Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa Berbahasa. Kami membandingkan pertunjukan SVM, LSTM dan sebuah ensemble dari kedua ini. We found the SVM performed best on our development set with an accuracy of 61.3% for English and 83% for Spanish.  Karakteristik yang digunakan untuk SVM adalah kata n-gram kecil dalam jangkauan 1 hingga 20, ditandai oleh TweetTokenizer dan dibuang dari kata berhenti. Pada set tes, model kami mencapai akurasi 34% dalam bahasa Inggris, dengan skor sedikit lebih rendah 29,7% akurasi dalam bahasa Spanyol.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka mfumo wa utabiri wa emoji kwenye twiti za Kiingereza na Kihispania, ulioandaliwa kwa ajili ya kazi ya SemEval-2018 kwenye Udhibiti wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji. Tulifananisha utendaji wa SVM, LSTM na mfano wa hizi mbili. Tumegundua SVM ilifanya vizuri katika maendeleo yetu yenye uhakika wa asilimia 61.3 kwa Kiingereza na asilimia 83 kwa Kihispania. Tamko zinazotumiwa kwa ajili ya SVM zinapungua maneno n a grams katika kiwango cha 1 hadi 20, zilizoonyeshwa na mtumiaji wa Twita na kuvua maneno ya kusitisha. Katika kipindi cha jaribio, mifano yetu ilipata uhakika wa asilimia 34 katika lugha ya Kiingereza, kwa kiwango kidogo cha ukweli wa asilimia 29.7 kwenye lugha ya Kihispania.', 'fa': 'ما یک سیستم برای پیش بینی ایموجی در tweets انگلیسی و اسپانیایی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، آماده برای وظیفه\u200cی semiEval-2018 در پیشنهاد ایموجی\u200cهای زیادی زبان است. ما اجرای SVM، LSTM و یک انجمن از این دو را مقایسه کردیم. ما پیدا کردیم که SVM بهترین انجام دادن در مجموعه توسعه ما با دقیق 61.3% برای انگلیسی و 83% برای اسپانیایی انجام داده است. ویژگی\u200cهایی که برای SVM استفاده می\u200cشود، کلمه n- گرم\u200cهای کوچک\u200cتر از ۱ تا ۲۰ است، که توسط یک تویت Tokenizer شناسایی می\u200cشود و از کلمه\u200cهای متوقف استفاده می\u200cشود. در مجموعه آزمایش، مدل ما دقیق 34 درصد در انگلیسی به دست آورد، با یک امتیاز کمی کمتر از دقیق 29.7 درصد در اسپانیایی.', 'ko': '우리는SemEval-18 다국어 표정 예측 임무를 위해 영어와 스페인어 트윗 표정 예측 시스템을 준비했다.SVM, LSTM 및 이 두 가지 방법의 성능을 비교했습니다.우리는 영어와 스페인어의 정확도가 각각 61.3%와 83%로 SVM이 우리의 개발집에서 가장 좋은 모습을 보였다.SVM은 1~20사이의 소문자 단어인 n-gram을 TweetTokenizer를 통해 표기하고 정지어를 제거하는 것이 특징이다.시험집에서 우리 모델은 영어에서 34%, 스페인어에서 29.7%로 약간 낮았다.', 'tr': 'Biz emoji bilen Iňlisçe we Ispanýolça tweets hakynda täzelikler üçin bir sistemi tanyşdyrýarys, bir çoxlu dil Emoji Prediksiýasynda taýýarlanan täzelikler üçin taýýarlanýar. Biz SVM, LSTM we bu ikisiniň bir görkezmesini çykardyk. Iňlis dilinde 61.3% iňlis dilinde we ispanyola 83% diýip ýetişmämizde gowy gazanýan SVM tapdyk. SVM üçin ullanylýa n özellikler 1-20 we 1-den kiçi kiçi/beýik kelime hasaplanýar we duran sözleriň sözleridir. Test düzeninde biziň modelimiz iňlis dilinde 34% dogrylygyny ýetdi, iňlis dilinde biraz az 29.7% dogrylygyny bar.', 'af': "Ons voorsien 'n stelsel vir emoji voorskou op Engels en Spaanse tweets, berei vir die SemEval-2018 taak op Multilingual Emoji voorskou. Ons vergelyk die prestasie van 'n SVM, LSTM en 'n ensemble van hierdie twee. Ons het die SVM die beste uitgevoer op ons ontwikkelingsstel met 'n presisie van 61. 3% vir Engels en 83% vir Spaanse. Die funksies gebruik word vir die SVM is kleiner woord n- grame in die omvang van 1 tot 20, geteken deur 'n TweetTokenizer en strip van stop woorde. Op die toets stel het ons model 'n presies van 34% op Engels bereik, met 'n bietjie minder telling van 29.7% presies op Spaanse.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një sistem për parashikimin e emoxhit në tweetet angleze dhe spanjolle, të përgatitur për detyrën SemEval-2018 mbi parashikimin shumëgjuhës Emoji. Ne krahasuam shfaqjen e një SVM, LSTM dhe një ansambël të këtyre dy. Ne gjetëm se SVM performoi më mirë në zhvillimin tonë me një saktësi 61.3% për anglishtin dhe 83% për spanjollin. Karakteristikat e përdorura për SVM janë fjalët e vogla n-gram n ë intervalin 1 deri 20, të shënuara nga një TweetTokenizer dhe të zhveshura nga fjalët e ndalimit. Në grupin e testit, modeli ynë arriti një saktësi prej 34% në anglisht, me një pikë pak më të ulët në 29.7% në spanjoll.', 'am': 'በይንግልዝና በስፓኒሽ ትዊተሮች ላይ የኢሜጂን ትንቢት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የSVM፣ LSTM እና የሁለቱን ምሳሌ እናሳያታለን፡፡ የSVM ፍጥረት ማድረግ የተሻለ ነው፡፡ የSVM ምርጫዎች በTweetTokenizer እና የቆም ቃላት በ 1-20 ክፍል ውስጥ ቃላት n-gram ትንሽ ናቸው፡፡ በተፈተናው ውስጥ ሞዴልናችን በንግግሊዝኛ ላይ 34 በመቶ እርግጠኛ አግኝቷል፡፡ በስፓኒሽ ላይ የ29.7 በመቶ ትንሽ ትክክለኛ ነጥብ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz ńįngilizce v…ô ńįspanyol tweetl…ôri bar…ôsind…ô emoji t…ôdbirl…ôrinin sistemini g√∂st…ôrdik, √ßoxlu dil Emoji t…ôdbirl…ôrinin SemEval-2018 iŇüi √ľ√ß√ľn hazńĪrlanmńĪŇüdńĪr. Biz SVM, LSTM v…ô bu ikisinin ensemblińüinin performansńĪnńĪ saldńĪq. ńįngilizce dilind…ô 61,3% v…ô ńįspanyolca 83%-d…ôn daha yaxŇüńĪ t…ôhsil etdiyimizi g√∂rd√ľk. SVM √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edil…ôn x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôr 1-20 arasńĪndakńĪ n-gramlarńĪn azaltńĪlmasńĪdńĪr, TweetTokenizer tarafńĪndan tanńĪnmńĪŇü v…ô duran s√∂zl…ôrd…ôn √ßńĪxarńĪlmńĪŇüdńĪr. Testl…ôrd…ô modell…ôrimiz ńįngilizce dilind…ô 34%-in dońüruluńüuna nail oldu, ńįspanyolca 29.7%-in dońüruluńüuna g√∂r…ô az d√ľŇü√ľk n√ľmun…ô sahib oldu.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք էմոջայի կանխատեսման համակարգ անգլերենի և իսպաներենի թվիթերի վրա, որը պատրաստված է 2018 թվականի կեսլեզվով էմոջայի կանխատեսման խնդրի համար: Մենք համեմատեցինք ԱՎՄ-ի, ԼՍԹՄ-ի և այս երկու համակարգի արտադրությունը: Մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ ԱՎՄ-ը լավագույն արդյունք ունեցավ մեր զարգացման համակարգում 61.3 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ անգլերենի և ինսպանիայի համար 1983 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ: ԱՎՄ-ի համար օգտագործվող հատկությունները n-գրամաններն են 1-20 տարածքում, որոնք նշանված են TweetTockener-ի կողմից և վերացված են դադարի բառերից: Փորձարկումների ընթացքում մեր մոդելը 34 տոկոսի ճշգրտություն հասավ անգլերենում, իսկ իսպաներեն 29.7 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը մի քիչ ավելի ցածր էր:', 'ca': "We present a system for emoji prediction on English and Spanish tweets, prepared for the SemEval-2018 task on Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  Vam comparar l'actuació d'un SVM, LSTM i un conjunt d'aquests dos. Vam trobar que la SVM va millor a la nostra configuració de desenvolupament amb una precisió del 61,3% en anglès i del 83% en espanyol. Les característiques utilitzades per a l'SVM són paraules n-grams en minúscules entre 1 i 20, etiquetades per un TweetTokenizer i desplaçades de paraules de parada. En el conjunt de proves, el nostre model va aconseguir una precisió del 34% en anglès, amb una puntuació una mica més baixa de 29,7% en espanyol.", 'cs': 'Představujeme systém pro predikci emoji na anglických a španělských tweetech, připravený pro úlohu SemEval-2018 na vícejazyčné předpovědi emoji. Porovnali jsme vystoupení SVM, LSTM a souboru těchto dvou. Zjistili jsme, že SVM vedl nejlépe na našem vývojovém setu s přesností 61,3% pro angličtinu a 83% pro španělštinu. Funkce používané pro SVM jsou malá písmena n-gramů v rozsahu 1 až 20, tokenizovaná TweetTokenizerem a zbavená stop slov. Na testovací sadě dosáhl náš model přesnosti 34% v angličtině, s mírně nižším skóre 29,7% přesnosti ve španělštině.', 'bn': 'আমরা ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশ টুইটে ইমোজি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণীর একটি সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করছি, যা মাল্টিভাষায় ইমোজি প্রেশনের জন্য প্রস্তুত। আমরা এসভিএম, এলস্টিএম এবং এই দুই দুইজনের প্রতি তুলনা করেছি। আমরা এসভিএম আমাদের উন্নয়নের ব্যাপারে সবচেয়ে ভালো কাজ করেছি যা ইংরেজী এবং স্প্যানিশের জন্য ৬১. এসভিএমের জন্য ব্যবহার করা বৈশিষ্ট্য ১ থেকে ২০ পর্যন্ত কম শব্দ এন-গ্রাম, টুইটার টুইটার টোকেনিজার দ্বারা চিহ্নিত এবং থামানো শব্দের মু On the test set, our model achieved an accuracy of 34% on English, with a slightly lower score of 29.7% accuracy on Spanish.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo sistem predviđanja emoji na engleskim i španjolskim tweetima, pripremljen za posao semiEval-2018 o višejezičkoj Emoji predviđanju. Usporedili smo izvršnost SVM, LSTM i ensemble ovih dvojica. Pronašli smo da je SVM najbolje izvršio na našoj razvojnoj seti sa preciznošću 61,3% za engleski i 83% za španjolski. Običnosti koje se koriste za SVM su smanjene riječi n-grama u rasponu od 1 do 20, koje je pokazala TweetTokenizer i skinula prestanačne riječi. Na testu, naš model je postigao tačnost od 34% na engleskom jeziku, s malo nižim rezultatom od 29,7% tačnosti na španjolskom jeziku.', 'et': 'Tutvustame inglise ja hispaania säutsude emojide ennustamise süsteemi, mis on ette valmistatud SemEval-2018 ülesandeks mitmekeelse emojiennustuse kohta. Võrdlesime SVM-i, LSTM-i ja nendest kahest koosneva ansambli sooritusi. Leidsime, et SVM oli meie arenduskomplektis parim, täpsusega 61,3% inglise ja 83% hispaania keeles. SVM-i funktsioonid on väiketähelised sõnad n-grammid vahemikus 1 kuni 20, märgistatud TweetTokenizeriga ja eemaldatud stopp-sõnadest. Testikomplektis saavutas meie mudel inglise keeles täpsuse 34%, hispaania keeles veidi madalama tulemusega 29,7%.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme englannin- ja espanjankielisten twiittien emoji-ennustejärjestelmän, joka on valmisteltu monikielisen emoji-ennusteen SemEval-2018 -tehtävään. Vertasimme SVM:n, LSTM:n ja näiden kahden yhtyeen suorituskykyä. SVM suoriutui parhaiten kehityssarjassamme 61,3% englanniksi ja 83% espanjaksi. SVM:n ominaisuudet ovat pieniä kirjaimia n-grammoja välillä 1–20, jotka on merkitty TweetTokenizerilla ja joista on poistettu stop-sanoja. Testisetissä mallimme saavutti englannin kielen tarkkuuden 34%, espanjan kielen tarkkuuden 29,7%.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo tahirno Emaji karo Tuytir Inggris karo Spanyol, nggawe kanggo nggawe semi-2008 lan mulai Multi-Lingué emuji predikion. Awak dhéwé nggilané perusahaan SVM, KST lan akeh nyong iki. Awak dhéwé ngerti SVM sing luwih-luwih kanggo ingkang dipunangé awak dhéwé, teka-teka kanggo 60.3% kanggo Inggris lan 3% kanggo Spanish. Perintah penting nggo SVM kuwi anake gambar n-gram sing ditambah menyang 1 ruti 2, ditambah banter Nang ujian sing paling, model dhéwé iso nggawe 34% kanggo inggiles, dadi sing katêpakan lan ujaran sing katêpakan karo 30.7% kesempatan kanggo spanyola.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo sistem za napovedovanje emojijev na angleških in španskih tweetih, pripravljen za nalogo SemEval-2018 o napovedovanju večjezičnih emojijev. Primerjali smo izvedbo SVM, LSTM in ansambla teh dveh. Našli smo najboljše rezultate SVM na našem razvojnem nizu z natančnostjo 61,3% za angleščino in 83% za španščino. Funkcije, ki se uporabljajo za SVM, so majhne črke besede n-gramov v razponu od 1 do 20, označene z TweetTokenizerjem in brez stop besed. Pri testiranju je naš model dosegel 34% natančnost pri angleščini, z nekoliko nižjo točnostjo 29,7% pri španščini.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani matsayi na'urar mutumci na Ingiriya da spanish, an yi tattalin wa aikin Semeval-2018 a kan Digizo na Digijini masu yawa. Mu samfani irin na SvM, LSM da wani misali na biyu. Mun sãmu SvM da ya aikata mafi kyaun kwamfyutan tufãfin da aka samu da tsari na 61.3% na Ingiriya da 83% na Isbanish. Furofati da ake amfani da wa SvM za'a ƙaranci maganar n-gram cikin tsakanin 1 zuwa 20, wanda aka yi bayani da wani na Twitter A kan jarraba, misalinmu ya sami tsarin 34% cikin Ingiriya, da wani abu kaɗan sauri na fassarar 29.7% na cikin Isbanish.", 'he': "אנחנו מציגים מערכת לחזות אמוג'י על טוויטים אנגליים וספרדיים, מוכנים למשימה SemEval-2018 על חיזוי אמוג'י רבולוגי. We compared the performance of an SVM, LSTM and an ensemble of these two.  מצאנו שהSVM ביצע הכי טוב על התפתחות שלנו עם מדויקה של 61.3% לאנגלית ו-83% לספרדית. המאפיינים השתמשו ב-SVM הן מילה n-גרם קטנה בטווח של 1 עד 20, מוצגת על ידי טוויט טוקניזר ומסרוקת ממילות עצור. בסט הבדיקות, הדוגמא שלנו השיגה מדויקה של 34% על אנגלית, עם נקודה קצת יותר נמוכה של 29.7% על ספרדית.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་འགྱུར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་SVM, LSTM་དང་མཚོན་རྟགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་འདི་ཚོ་མཉམ་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་SVM་གྱིས་ཡར་རྒྱས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་མཐར་ཡོད། ཨིན་ཇིས་ཡིན་ན་སྐྱེས་ཚད་དང་། ས་ཕིས་ཡིན་ན་83%. SVM ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཆ་ཁོངས་ཚིག་ཡིག་ཆ་གཅིག་ལས་༢༠་ཙམ་ཐུབ་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཚིག་n-grams ་ཆུང་ཀུ་ཡིན། བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཚད་འཛིན་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ཏུ་འགྲོ་བ་སྐྱེལ།'}
{'en': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ar': 'YNU-HPCC في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: نموذج Bi-GRU متعدد المجموعات مع آلية الانتباه للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية متعدد اللغات', 'es': 'YNU-HPCC en la Tarea 2 de SemEval-2018: Modelo Bi-GRU de múltiples conjuntos con mecanismo de atención para la predicción multilingüe de emojis', 'pt': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Modelo Bi-GRU multi-ensemble com mecanismo de atenção para previsão de emojis multilíngues', 'fr': "YNU-HPCC au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Modèle bi-GRU multi-ensembles avec mécanisme d'attention pour la prédiction multilingue des emoji", 'ja': 'YNU - HPCC at SemEval -2018 Task 2: Multi - ensemble Bi - GRU Model with Attention mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'zh': 'YNU-HPCC在SemEval-2018务2:多Bi-GRU与多言表情符号占', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर YNU-HPCC: बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी के लिए ध्यान तंत्र के साथ बहु-कलाकारों की टुकड़ी द्वि-जीआरयू मॉडल', 'ru': 'YNU-HPCC на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Многокомпонентная модель Bi-GRU с механизмом внимания для многоязычного прогнозирования эмодзи', 'ga': 'YNU-HPCC ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Samhail Il-ensemble Bi-GRU le Meicníocht Airde do Thuar Emoji Ilteangach', 'hu': 'YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Több együttes Bi-GRU modell figyelemmechanizmussal a többnyelvű emoji jósláshoz', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: Πολυσύνθετο μοντέλο με μηχανισμό προσοχής για την πρόβλεψη πολυγλωσσικών εμόζι', 'ka': 'YNU', 'lt': 'YNU-HPCC per 2018 m. pusmetį 2 užduotis: daugiakalbis dviejų GRU modelis su dėmesio mechanizmu daugiakalbėms emojų prognozėms', 'it': 'YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Modello Bi-GRU multi-ensemble con meccanismo di attenzione per la previsione di emoji multilingue', 'kk': 'YNU', 'mk': 'YNU-HPCC на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Мулти-ансембл би-GRU модел со внимание механизам за мултијазична емои предвидување', 'ms': 'YNU-HPCC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Model Bi-GRU Multi-ensemble dengan Mekanisme Perhatian untuk Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: Multi- ensemble Bi- GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'mt': 'YNU-HPCC f’SemEval-2018 Task 2: Mudell Bi-GRU b’Multi-ensemble b’Mekkaniżmu ta’ Attenzjoni għal Tbassir Emoji Multilingwi', 'mn': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'no': 'YNU-HPCC at semiEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'pl': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Wieloosobowy model Bi-GRU z mechanizmem uwagi dla wielojęzycznej prognozy emoji', 'ro': 'YNU-HPCC la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Model Bi-GRU multiansamblu cu mecanism de atenție pentru predicția emoji multilingvă', 'sr': 'YNU-HPCC na semiEval-2018 Task 2: Multi ensemble Bi-GRU Model sa mehanizam pažnje za višejezičku emisiju predviđanje', 'so': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'sv': 'YNU-HPCC på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU modell med uppmärksamhetsmekanism för flerspråkig emoji förutsägelse', 'si': 'YNA-HPCC at Half-2018 Job 2: Multi-ensEmble Bi-GRU Model with Attension Engineering for Multilanguage Emobi Precdiction', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 2: Multi- ensemble Bi- GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ur': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Máy phát dịch YNGU tại SemEvl-208 Task 2: dàn hợp hai-GRU model với cơ chế chú ý cho dự đoán đa ngôn ngữ Emoji', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Многоансамбълен модел с механизъм за внимание за многоезично прогнозиране на емоджи', 'da': 'YNU-HPCC på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU model med opmærksomhedsmekanisme for flersproget emoji forudsigelse', 'hr': 'YNU-HPCC na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU model s mehanizam pažnje za višejezičku predviđanje emoji', 'nl': 'YNU-HPCC bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model met Aandacht Mechanisme voor Meertalige Emoji Voorspelling', 'de': 'YNU-HPCC bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Multi-Ensemble Bi-GRU Modell mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus für mehrsprachige Emoji Vorhersage', 'fa': 'YNU', 'ko': '2018년SemEval에서의 YNU-HPCC 퀘스트 2: 다국어 이모티콘 예측의 주의 메커니즘을 가진 다중 통합 Bi-GRU 모델', 'tr': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'sq': 'YNU-HPCC në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'af': 'YNU-HPCC by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model met Aangaande Mekanisme vir Multilingual Emoji Voorskou', 'sw': 'YNU-HPCC katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 2: Utawala wa Mitandao mingi Bi-GRU na Mfumo wa Kutahadhiri kwa Udhibiti wa lugha nyingi', 'am': 'ስራ 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: বহুভাষী বি-GRU মডেলের সাথে মনোযোগ প্রদান করা মেকেনিস্টেমের সাথে বহুভাষী এমোজি প্রেমিশনের জন্য', 'az': 'YNU-HPCC 2. Gözəl: Multilingual Emoji Prediction üçün çox-ensemble Bi-GRU Modeli', 'bs': 'YNU-HPCC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model sa mehanizam pažnje za višejezičku emisiju predviđanje', 'hy': 'YNH-ՀՊՔ-ը, 2018-ի կիսալեզվի 2. հանձնարարությունը. բազմահամակարգչային երկու-GRU մոդել, որը ունի ուշադրության մեխանիզմ բազմալեզվի էմոյի կանխատեսման համար', 'cs': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU model s pozornostním mechanismem pro vícejazyčné emoji predikci', 'fi': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 2: Moniosainen Bi-GRU-malli monikielisen emoji-ennusteen huomiomekanismilla', 'et': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: mitmekeelse emoji prognoosi tähelepanu mehhanismiga mitmekeelse emoji prognoosimise mitmekeelse multiansambli Bi-GRU mudel', 'ca': 'YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'id': 'YNU-HPCC di SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'jv': 'YNU', 'ha': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEV-2018 Task 2: multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attemption Mekanimati for multiziman Emoji Prediction', 'he': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'sk': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 naloga 2: Večansambelni Bi-GRU model z mehanizmom pozornosti za napoved večjezičnih emojijev', 'bo': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multi-ensemble Bi-GRU Model with Attention Mechanism for Multilingual Emoji Prediction'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 2, which aims to predict the most likely associated emoji, given a tweet in English or Spanish. We normalized text-based tweets during pre-processing, following which we utilized a bi-directional gated recurrent unit with an attention mechanism to build our base model. Multi-models with or without class weights were trained for the ensemble methods. We boosted models without class weights, and only strong boost classifiers were identified. In our system, not only was a boosting method used, but we also took advantage of the voting ensemble method to enhance our final system result. Our method demonstrated an obvious improvement of approximately 3 % of the macro F1 score in English and 2 % in Spanish.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نهجنا في SemEval-2018 Task 2 ، والتي تهدف إلى التنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية المرتبطة على الأرجح ، في ظل تغريدة باللغة الإنجليزية أو الإسبانية. قمنا بتطبيع التغريدات المستندة إلى النص أثناء المعالجة المسبقة ، وبعد ذلك استخدمنا وحدة متكررة ذات بوابات ثنائية الاتجاه مع آلية انتباه لبناء نموذجنا الأساسي. تم تدريب النماذج المتعددة بأوزان الفصل أو بدونها على طرق التجميع. لقد عززنا النماذج بدون أوزان الفئات ، ولم يتم تحديد سوى مصنفات التعزيز القوية. في نظامنا ، لم يتم استخدام طريقة التعزيز فحسب ، بل استفدنا أيضًا من طريقة مجموعة التصويت لتحسين النتيجة النهائية لنظامنا. أظهرت طريقتنا تحسنًا واضحًا بنسبة 3٪ تقريبًا من درجة F1 الكلية في اللغة الإنجليزية و 2٪ باللغة الإسبانية.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre approche de la Tâche 2 de SEMEVAL-2018, qui vise à prédire les emoji associés les plus probables, à partir d'un tweet en anglais ou en espagnol. Nous avons normalisé les tweets textuels pendant le prétraitement, après quoi nous avons utilisé une unité récurrente fermée bidirectionnelle avec un mécanisme d'attention pour construire notre modèle de base. Des modèles multiples avec ou sans poids de classe ont été formés pour les méthodes d'ensemble. Nous avons boosté les modèles sans poids de classe, et seuls les classificateurs boost puissants ont été identifiés. Dans notre système, non seulement une méthode d'amplification a été utilisée, mais nous avons également profité de la méthode de l'ensemble des votes pour améliorer le résultat final de notre système. Notre méthode a démontré une amélioration évidente d'environ 3\xa0% du score macro F1 en anglais et de 2\xa0% en espagnol.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa abordagem para a Tarefa 2 do SemEval-2018, que visa prever o emoji associado mais provável, dado um tweet em inglês ou espanhol. Normalizamos os tweets baseados em texto durante o pré-processamento, após o qual utilizamos uma unidade recorrente bidirecional com um mecanismo de atenção para construir nosso modelo básico. Multi-modelos com ou sem pesos de classe foram treinados para os métodos ensemble. Impulsionamos modelos sem pesos de classe e apenas classificadores de impulso fortes foram identificados. Em nosso sistema, não só foi utilizado um método de boosting, mas também aproveitamos o método de votação por ensemble para melhorar o resultado final do nosso sistema. Nosso método demonstrou uma melhora óbvia de aproximadamente 3% da pontuação macro F1 em inglês e 2% em espanhol.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro enfoque de la Tarea 2 de SemEval-2018, que tiene como objetivo predecir el emoji más probable asociado, dado un tweet en inglés o español. Normalizamos los tuits basados en texto durante el procesamiento previo, después de lo cual utilizamos una unidad recurrente con compuerta bidireccional con un mecanismo de atención para construir nuestro modelo base. Se entrenaron modelos múltiples con o sin pesos de clase para los métodos de conjunto. Impulsamos los modelos sin pesos de clase y solo se identificaron clasificadores de impulso fuertes. En nuestro sistema, no solo se utilizó un método de impulso, sino que también aprovechamos el método del conjunto de votación para mejorar el resultado final del sistema. Nuestro método demostró una mejora obvia de aproximadamente un 3% de la puntuación macro F1 en inglés y un 2% en español.', 'ja': 'この論文では、英語またはスペイン語のツイートを使用して、最も可能性の高い関連する絵文字を予測することを目的としたSemEval -2018タスク2へのアプローチについて説明します。事前処理中にテキストベースのツイートを正規化し、その後、注意メカニズムを備えた双方向ゲーティングリカレントユニットを利用してベースモデルを構築しました。クラスウェイトの有無にかかわらず、マルチモデルをアンサンブル法のために訓練した。クラスウェイトのないモデルをブーストし、強力なブースト分類子のみが特定されました。私たちのシステムでは、ブースト法だけでなく、投票アンサンブル法を活用して、最終的なシステム結果を強化しました。私たちの方法は、英語ではマクロF 1スコアの約3 ％、スペイン語では2 ％の明らかな改善を示しました。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2018 Task 2之法,要在占候最有关表情符号,给定英语或西班牙语推文。 预处理之间规范化本推文,因双向门控循环单元以构其大体。 为集成法训练了有无类权重的多模样。 我们升了没有类权重的模样,而且只定了强大的增强分类器。 吾之系统,不惟用一升之法,而又因投票集成之法以强吾终也。 吾道明英语之宏观F1分明显提高约3%,西班牙语增2%也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 टास्क 2 के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है, जिसका उद्देश्य अंग्रेजी या स्पेनिश में एक ट्वीट को देखते हुए सबसे अधिक संभावना वाले जुड़े इमोजी की भविष्यवाणी करना है। हमने पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण के दौरान पाठ-आधारित ट्वीट्स को सामान्यीकृत किया, जिसके बाद हमने अपने बेस मॉडल का निर्माण करने के लिए एक ध्यान तंत्र के साथ एक द्वि-दिशात्मक गेटेड आवर्तक इकाई का उपयोग किया। वर्ग के वजन के साथ या बिना बहु-मॉडल को पहनावा विधियों के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया गया था। हमने कक्षा के वजन के बिना मॉडल को बढ़ावा दिया, और केवल मजबूत बूस्ट क्लासिफायरकी पहचान की गई। हमारे सिस्टम में, न केवल एक बूस्टिंग विधि का उपयोग किया गया था, बल्कि हमने अपने अंतिम सिस्टम परिणाम को बढ़ाने के लिए मतदान पहनावा विधि का भी लाभ उठाया। हमारी विधि ने अंग्रेजी में मैक्रो एफ 1 स्कोर के लगभग 3% और स्पेनिश में 2% के स्पष्ट सुधार का प्रदर्शन किया।', 'ru': 'В этом документе описывается наш подход к задаче 2 SemEval-2018, которая направлена на прогнозирование наиболее вероятных связанных эмодзи, учитывая твит на английском или испанском языке. Мы нормализовали текстовые твиты во время предварительной обработки, после чего использовали двунаправленный вентилируемый рекуррентный блок с механизмом внимания для построения нашей базовой модели. Мультимодели с весом класса или без него были обучены методам ансамбля. Мы улучшили модели без веса класса, и были определены только сильные классификаторы. В нашей системе не только использовался метод форсирования, но мы также использовали метод ансамбля голосования для улучшения нашего конечного результата системы. Наш метод продемонстрировал явное улучшение примерно на 3% от макрооценки F1 в английском и 2% в испанском языках.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcur chuige maidir le SemEval-2018 Tasc 2, a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige an emoji is dóichí a bhaineann leis a thuar, nuair a thugtar tweet i mBéarla nó i Spáinnis. Normalaithe againn tweets bunaithe ar théacs le linn na réamhphróiseála, agus ina dhiaidh sin d'úsáideamar aonad athfhillteach déthreorach le geata le meicníocht aird chun ár mbonn-mhúnla a thógáil. Cuireadh oiliúint ar il-samhlacha le meáchain ranga nó gan iad do na modhanna ensemble. Treisíomar samhlacha gan meáchain ranga, agus níor aithníodh ach aicmitheoirí treisithe láidre. Inár gcóras, ní hamháin gur úsáideadh modh treisithe, ach bhaineamar leas freisin as an modh ensemble vótála chun ár dtoradh córais deiridh a fheabhsú. Léirigh ár modh feabhas soiléir de thart ar 3% den scór macrai F1 sa Bhéarla agus 2% sa Spáinnis.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 feladat 2 megközelítését, amelynek célja, hogy megjósolja a legvalószínűbb kapcsolódó emoji, ha egy angol vagy spanyol tweet. Az előfeldolgozás során normalizáltuk a szövegalapú tweeteket, ezt követően egy kétirányú, zárt visszatérő egységet használtunk fel figyelemmechanizmussal az alapmodellünk megépítéséhez. A többszörös modelleket osztálysúlyú vagy anélküli súlyokkal képeztük az együttes módszerekre. Osztálysúly nélküli modelleket erősítettünk, és csak erős boost osztályozókat azonosítottunk. Rendszerünkben nemcsak egy fellendítő módszert alkalmaztunk, hanem a szavazóegyüttes módszerét is kihasználtuk, hogy növeljük végeredményünket. Módszerünk nyilvánvaló javulást mutatott az F1 makro pontszám körülbelül 3%-ával angolul és 2%-ával spanyolul.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro approccio a SemEval-2018 Task 2, che mira a prevedere le emoji associate più probabilmente, dato un tweet in inglese o spagnolo. Abbiamo normalizzato i tweet basati sul testo durante la pre-elaborazione, in seguito abbiamo utilizzato un'unità ricorrente bidirezionale gated con un meccanismo di attenzione per costruire il nostro modello base. Multi-modelli con o senza pesi di classe sono stati addestrati per i metodi di ensemble. Abbiamo potenziato i modelli senza pesi di classe, e solo i classificatori forti di spinta sono stati identificati. Nel nostro sistema, non solo è stato utilizzato un metodo di amplificazione, ma abbiamo anche approfittato del metodo di voto ensemble per migliorare il risultato finale del nostro sistema. Il nostro metodo ha dimostrato un evidente miglioramento di circa il 3% del punteggio macro F1 in inglese e del 2% in spagnolo.", 'ka': 'ამ დოგომაში ჩვენი მიღება SemEval-2018 მოქმედების 2-ზე, რომელიც უნდა გადაწყვეტის ყველაზე შესაძლებელი ემოჯია, რომელიც ინგლისური ან სპანელი გადაწყვეტილია. ჩვენ ტექსტის გარეშე გარეშე ტექსტის გარეშე გარეშე გარეშე, რომელიც ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ ჩვენი ბაზის მოდელის გარეშე მექსინემი. მრავალ მოდელები კლასის სიმაღლეებით ან ბვჱ კლასის სიმაღლეებისთვის შესწავლობულია. ჩვენ კლასის სიმაღლე უკვე მოდელები გავიღებთ, და მხოლოდ უფრო ძალიან უფრო დიდი კლასიფიკაცირები იღებულია. ჩვენი სისტემაში არა მხოლოდ გამოიყენებული სხვადასხვა მეტი, მაგრამ ჩვენ ასევე გამოიყენეთ გადაწყვეტილების სხვადასხვა მეტი, რომელიც ჩვენი ბოლო სისტემის შედეგის გაუ ჩვენი მეთოდი მოდენსტრებულია მაკრო F1 წერტილის 3% და 2% სპანელში.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει την προσέγγισή μας στην εργασία 2, η οποία αποσκοπεί στην πρόβλεψη των πιο πιθανών σχετικών emoji, δεδομένου ενός tweet στα αγγλικά ή ισπανικά. Κανονικοποιήσαμε τα γραπτά tweets κατά την προεπεξεργασία, μετά από τα οποία χρησιμοποιήσαμε μια αμφίδρομη κλειστή επαναλαμβανόμενη μονάδα με μηχανισμό προσοχής για να χτίσουμε το βασικό μας μοντέλο. Για τις μεθόδους του συνόλου εκπαιδεύτηκαν πολλαπλά μοντέλα με ή χωρίς βάρη τάξης. Ενισχύσαμε μοντέλα χωρίς βάρη κατηγορίας και εντοπίστηκαν μόνο ισχυροί ταξινομητές ενίσχυσης. Στο σύστημά μας, όχι μόνο χρησιμοποιήθηκε μια μέθοδος ενίσχυσης, αλλά εκμεταλλευτήκαμε επίσης τη μέθοδο του συνόλου ψηφοφορίας για να βελτιώσουμε το τελικό αποτέλεσμα του συστήματος. Η μέθοδος μας έδειξε προφανή βελτίωση περίπου 3% της μακροχρόνιας βαθμολογίας F1 στα αγγλικά και 2% στα ισπανικά.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas mūsų požiūris į „SemEval-2018“ 2 užduotį, kuria siekiama prognozuoti labiausiai tikėtinus susijusius emodžius, atlikus tweet ą anglų arba ispanų kalbomis. Išankstinio apdorojimo metu normalizuojame tekstu pagrįstus tweetus, po kurių naudojome dvikrypčius vartus naudojantį pakartotinį vienetą su dėmesio mechanizmu mūsų baziniam modeliui sukurti. Daugiamodeliai su klasės svoriu arba be jo buvo apmokyti komplekso metodams. Mes padidinome modelius be klasės svorio, ir buvo nustatyti tik stiprūs skatinimo klasifikatoriai. Mūsų sistemoje buvo naudojamas ne tik skatinimo metodas, bet ir balsavimo rinkinio metodas, siekiant pagerinti mūsų galutinį sistemos rezultatą. Mūsų metodas akivaizdžiai pagerėjo maždaug 3 % makro F1 rezultato anglų kalba ir 2 % ispanų kalba.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan kita ke SemEval-2018 Tugas 2, yang bertujuan untuk meramalkan emoji yang paling mungkin berkaitan, diberikan tweet dalam bahasa Inggeris atau Sepanyol. Kami normalisasi tweet berdasarkan teks semasa pra-proses, mengikutnya kami menggunakan unit berulang pintu dua arah dengan mekanisme perhatian untuk membina model dasar kami. Multi-models with or without class weights were trained for the ensemble methods.  Kami meningkatkan model tanpa berat kelas, dan hanya pengendali tenaga yang kuat dikenali. Dalam sistem kita, bukan hanya kaedah penolakan yang digunakan, tetapi kita juga mengambil keuntungan kaedah ensemble suara untuk meningkatkan hasil sistem akhir kita. Kaedah kami menunjukkan peningkatan yang jelas sekitar 3% skor makro F1 dalam bahasa Inggeris dan 2% dalam bahasa Sepanyol.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува нашиот пристап до SemEval-2018 задача 2, која има за цел да ги предвиде најверојатно поврзаните емоџи, со објавување на Твитер на англиски или шпански. Ние нормализиравме Твитери базирани на текст за време на преобработувањето, по кои употребивме двоупотребна повторна единица со механизам на внимание за изградба на нашиот базичен модел. Мулти-модели со или без класни тегови беа обучени за методите на ансемблот. Ние ги зајакнавме моделите без класни тегови, и само силни зајакнувачи се идентификувани. Во нашиот систем, не само што беше употребен метод за зајакнување, туку и ние го искористивме методот на гласачкиот ансембл за зајакнување на нашиот конечен системски резултат. Нашиот метод покажа очигледно подобрување на околу 3 отсто од макро Ф1 оценката на англиски и 2 отсто на шпански.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің 2- жартық тапсырманың half Eval- 2018 тапсырмасына тәсілдігімізді таңдайды. Бұл ағылшын не испан тілінде tweet берілген ең мақсатты эмоджтерді алдын алатын. Біз мәтін негіздеген tweets- тізбектерді алдын- ала өткізу кезінде кәдімгіледік, олардан кейін негізгі моделі құру үшін екі бағытты қайталану бірлігін қолдандық. Көптеген үлгілер клас теңдігі не қарсыз теңдіктері сәйкестік әдістері үшін оқылған. Біз класс жиілігі жоқ үлгілерді қолдандық. Тек күшті классификаторларды анықталды. Біздің жүйемізде тек қолданылатын көтеру әдісі емес, бірақ соңғы жүйеңіздің нәтижесін көтеру үшін сондай-ақ қолдану әдісін қолдандық. Біздің әдіміміз ағылшын тілінде және испан тілінде 2% макро F1 деңгейінің 3% жақсартуын көрсетті.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 2-ലേക്ക് നമ്മുടെ വഴിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലോ സ്പാനിഷിലോ ഒരു ട മുമ്പ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d സാധാരണമാക്കി. അതിനുശേഷം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു രണ്ട് തിരിച്ചറിയു Multi-models with or without class weights were trained for the ensemble methods.  ക്ലാസിന്റെ തൂക്കങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാത്ത മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കി. ശക്തിയുള്ള ബൂസ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ അവസാനത്തെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഫലം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള വോട്ടിന്റെ മാര്\u200dഗം മാത്രമല്ല നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മാക്രോ എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d മൂന്ന് ശതമാനം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d 2% സ്പാനിഷ്', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-approċċ tagħna għal SemEval-2018 Task 2, li għandu l-għan li jipprevedi l-emoji l-aktar probabbli assoċjati, minħabba tweet bl-Ingliż jew bl-Ispanjol. Aħna nnormalizzaw tweets ibbażati fuq it-test waqt il-preipproċessar, li segwew użajna unit à rikorrenti bi-direzzjonijiet b’gated b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni biex nibnu l-mudell bażiku tagħna. Ġew imħarrġa mudelli multipli bi jew mingħajr piżijiet tal-klassi għall-metodi tal-ensemble. We boosted models without class weights, and only strong boost classifiers were identified.  Fis-sistema tagħna, ma kienx biss metodu ta’ tisħiħ użat, iżda ħadna vantaġġ ukoll mill-metodu tal-ġabra tal-vot biex intejbu r-riżultat finali tas-sistema tagħna. Il-metodu tagħna wera titjib ovvju ta’ madwar 3% tal-punteġġ makro F1 bl-Ingliż u 2% bl-Ispanjol.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2018 2 даалгаврыг тайлбарладаг. Энэ нь Англи, Испан хэлний tweet болон хамгийн их холбоотой эмоджийг тайлбарлах зорилго юм. Бид өмнө үйлдвэрлэх үед текст суурь бий болгосон Tweets-ийг энгийн болгож, дараа нь бид суурь загварыг бүтээх анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмтай хоёр чиглэлт дахин дахин дахин нэгж ашигласан. Ихэнх загварууд ангийнхээ жинтэй эсвэл байхгүй байх арга загваруудын хувьд сургалт хийгдсэн. Бид хичээлийн жингүйгээр загваруудыг дэвшүүлсэн. Зөвхөн хүчтэй нэмэгдүүлэгчдийг тодорхойлдог. Бидний системд зөвхөн нэмэгдүүлэх арга биш, гэхдээ бид хамгийн сүүлийн системийн үр дүнг нэмэгдүүлэх арга замыг ашигласан. Бидний арга нь Англи хэл дээр ойролцоогоор F1-ийн макро хувьд 3%-ын хөгжлийг харуулсан ба Испан хэл дээр 2%.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie abordarea noastră față de SemEval-2018 Task 2, care își propune să prezică cel mai probabil emoji asociat, dat fiind un tweet în limba engleză sau spaniolă. Am normalizat tweeturile pe bază de text în timpul pre-procesării, după care am folosit o unitate recurentă bidirecțională cu un mecanism de atenție pentru a construi modelul nostru de bază. Modelele multiple cu sau fără greutăți de clasă au fost instruite pentru metodele ansamblului. Am amplificat modele fără greutăți de clasă, și au fost identificate numai clasificatoare puternice boost. În sistemul nostru, nu numai că a fost folosită o metodă de stimulare, dar am profitat și de metoda ansamblului de vot pentru a spori rezultatul sistemului nostru final. Metoda noastră a demonstrat o îmbunătățire evidentă de aproximativ 3% din scorul macro F1 în limba engleză și 2% în limba spaniolă.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver tilnærminga vårt til semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2, som mål å foregå det mest sannsynleg tilknytte emoji, gitt ein tweet på engelsk eller spansk. Vi normaliserte tekstbaserte tweeter under førehandsaming, etter at vi brukte ein divretning gated recurrent eining med ein oppmerksmekanisme for å bygge vår grunnmodell. Fleire modeller med eller utan klassevekt er trengd for ensemblemmetodane. Vi styrke modeller utan klassevekt, og berre sterke økingsklassifikatorar vart identifiserte. I systemet vårt var ikkje berre ein økningsmetode brukt, men vi brukte også fordel av stemmemetoden for å forbetra siste systemresultatet vårt. Metoden vårt demonstrerte eit åpenbart forbedring av omtrent 3% av makro F1- poeng på engelsk og 2% på spansk.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasze podejście do SemEval-2018 Task 2, którego celem jest przewidzenie najprawdopodobniej powiązanych emoji, biorąc pod uwagę tweet w języku angielskim lub hiszpańskim. Znormalizowaliśmy tweety tekstowe podczas przetwarzania wstępnego, po czym wykorzystaliśmy dwukierunkową jednostkę powtarzającą z mechanizmem uwagi do zbudowania naszego modelu bazowego. Pod kątem metod zespołowych przeszkolono modele z ciężarem klasowym lub bez. Wzmocniliśmy modele bez wagi klasowej i zidentyfikowano tylko silne klasyfikatory boostu. W naszym systemie zastosowano nie tylko metodę boostingu, ale również wykorzystaliśmy metodę zespołu głosowania, aby poprawić ostateczny wynik systemu. Nasza metoda wykazała oczywistą poprawę około 3% wyniku makro F1 w języku angielskim i 2% w języku hiszpańskim.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සේම්වල්-2018 කාර්ය 2 වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් අදහස් කරනවා තමුන්ග්\u200dරීසි නැත්තම් ස්පැන අපි ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස කරපු වෙලාවට පස්සේ පාළු අධාරිත ට්විට් සාමාන්\u200dයය කරනවා, ඊට පස්සේ අපි දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාත්මක යුනිට් එක ගොඩක් මෝඩේල් වර්ගයක් තියෙනවා නැත්නම් වර්ගයක් තියෙනවා නැත්නම් වර්ගයක් තියෙනවා නැත්නම් සං අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විශේෂය නැති විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න විශේෂය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, සහ ශක්තිමත් විශේෂයෙ අපේ පද්ධතියේ විතරයි, අපේ අවසාන පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විතරයි විතරයි, නමුත් අපි අන්තිම පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්  අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා පැහැදිලි වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරලා ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ මැක්රෝ F1 ස්කෝර් එක', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa dhaqdhaqaalka aan u soo galno SemEval-2018 shaqo 2, kaas oo ku qoran inuu sii sheego waxa ugu macquul badan emoji, kaas oo ku qoran twiti af Ingiriis ama Isbanish. Intii hore baaraandegista, waxaynu isticmaalnay xarunta dib u soo celinta ee la soo diro, taas oo ah meyminimo a an dhisno modellka aasaasiga ah. Tusaale badan oo ay leeyihiin ama aan miisaanka fasalka la'aantood waxaa loo baray qaababka lagu sameeyo. Tusaalooyinka aan fasalka miisaan lahayn, waxaa la aqoonsaday fasalka xoogga badan oo kaliya. nidaamkayaga oo keliya ma ahayn qaab boosting oo kaliya ee lagu isticmaalay, laakiin waxaynu isticmaalnay qaabka codeynta oo aan ku kordhinnay nidaamka ugu dambeeya. Metalkeena waxay muuqatay hagaajinta qiyaastii saddex boqolkiiba kooxda afka Ingiriis iyo 2% Isbanish.", 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup zadatku 2. iz polEvala-2018, koji je cilj da predvidi najverovatnije povezaniji emoji, s obzirom na tweet na engleskom ili španjolskom jeziku. Normalizirali smo tujtove na tekstu tokom predobrazovanja, nakon kojih smo iskoristili dvosmjernu povratnu jedinicu sa pažnjom mehanizam za izgradnju našeg baznog model a. Višestruki modeli sa ili bez težine klase su obučeni za metode ensemble. Pojačali smo modele bez težine klase, a identifikovani su samo jači klasifikatori. U našem sistemu, ne samo je korištena metoda jačanja, nego smo takođe iskoristili i metodu glasanja za poboljšanje rezultata našeg konačnog sistema. Naša metoda je pokazala oèigledno poboljšanje približno 3% makro F1 rezultata na engleskom i 2% na španjolskom.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt förhållningssätt till SemEval-2018 Task 2, som syftar till att förutsäga de mest sannolika associerade emoji, givet en tweet på engelska eller spanska. Vi normaliserade textbaserade tweets under förbehandlingen, varefter vi använde en tvåriktad gated återkommande enhet med en uppmärksamhetsmekanism för att bygga vår basmodell. Multimodeller med eller utan klassvikter tränades för ensemblemetoderna. Vi boostade modeller utan klassvikter, och endast starka boost klassificerare identifierades. I vårt system användes inte bara en förstärkningsmetod, utan vi utnyttjade också röstensemblemetoden för att förbättra vårt slutliga systemresultat. Vår metod visade en tydlig förbättring på cirka 3% av makro F1 poäng på engelska och 2% på spanska.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری تقریبا SemEval-2018 ٹاکس 2 کے لئے بیان کرتا ہے، جس کا مطلب ہے کہ سب سے زیادہ مشترک emoji کی پیش بینی کرنا چاہتا ہے، انگلیسی یا اسپانیایی میں ایک ٹویٹ دی جاتی ہے۔ ہم نے پہلے پردازش کے موقع متن بنیادی ٹیوٹ کو معمول کردیا تھا، اس کے بعد ہم نے ایک دوسری دئیرسیٹ گٹ ریٹر یونیٹ کو استعمال کیا تھا جو ہمارے بنیادی موڈل بنانے کے لئے توجه کے مکانیسم سے ہے. کلاس وزن کے ساتھ یا بغیر بہت سی موڈل انسبل طریقوں کے لئے آموزش کی گئی تھی۔ ہم نے کلاس وزن کے بغیر مدل کو اضافہ کیا تھا، اور صرف مضبوط اضافہ کلاسیر کو پہچان دیا گیا تھا۔ ہمارے سیسٹم میں، صرف ایک بڑھنے کا طریقہ نہیں تھا، بلکہ ہم نے اپنے آخری سیسٹم کا نتیجہ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے ویٹ اندازے کا طریقہ استعمال کیا تھا۔ ہمارا طریقہ صریح ترجیح دیتا ہے کہ مکرو F1 اسکور کی تقریباً 3% کی انگلیسی میں اور 2% اسپانیایی میں۔', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval-2018 பணி 2 க்கு எங்கள் வழிமுறையை விளக்குகிறது, அது எதிர்பார்க்கும் அதிகமாக தொடர்புடைய உணர்வு, ஆங்கிலத்தில் அல்லது  நாங்கள் முன் செயல்படும் போது உரையில் அடிப்படையான tweets இயல்பாக்கியமைத்தோம், பின்பு நாங்கள் ஒரு இரு திசையாக திரும்ப திரும்ப முடிவு  வகுப்பு எடைகளுடன் அல்லது இல்லாமல் பல மாதிரிகள் முன்னிருப்பு முறைகளுக்கு பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டது. நாங்கள் வகுப்பு எடை இல்லாத மாதிரிகளை மேம்படுத்தினோம், மற்றும் வலிமையான பூர்த்தி வகுப்பாளர்கள் மட்டு எங்கள் கணினியில், அது மட்டும் உபயோகிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் மட்டுமல்ல, ஆனால் நாங்கள் முடிவு கணினியின் முடிவை அதிகரிக்க பயன்பட எங்கள் முறைமையில் ஒரு தெளிவான முன்னேற்றத்தை காண்பித்தது குறைந்த மேக்ரோ F1 மதிப்பில் 3% மேக்ரோ எஃப்1 மதிப்புகள் ஆ', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 Vazifaning 2 vazifasini aytadi. Bu eng ingliz tilida yoki Ispanchaga xabar berilgan eng eng muhimi bog'liq emoji hisoblanishini ko'rsatadi. Biz birinchi vazifa davomida matn asosiy Twitterlarini normal qildik. Bu yerda biz bir xil qo'yilgan davom etilgan bir tizimdan foydalanamiz, bizning asosiy modelimizni yaratish uchun foydalanish imkoniyatini ishlatdik. Name Biz sinfning o'lchami yo'q modellarni o'zlashtirdik, va faqat katta ko'proq darajalar aniqlangan. Bizning tizimimizda faqat ishlatilgan yozuvchi usuli emas, balki biz oxirgi tizimning natijasini oshirish uchun voting ensemble usulini foydalandik. Bizning usuli ingliz tilida Makro F1 scorning 3% darajasini ko'rsatadi va Ispanchaga 2% yaxshi o'zgarishni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả cách tiếp cận của chúng ta với nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 2, nhằm dự đoán những biểu tượng tương ứng nhiều nhất, được gửi từ tiếng Anh hay tiếng Tây Ban Nha. Chúng tôi đã làm bình thường những tweet dựa trên văn bản trong quá trình xử lý, sau đó chúng tôi sử dụng một đơn vị lưu động hai hướng với một cơ chế tập trung để xây dựng mô hình nền. Các mô hình đa có hay không tạ lớp được huấn luyện cho các phương pháp dàn nhạc. Chúng tôi nâng đỡ các mẫu không cần trọng lượng, và chỉ những người phân loại mạnh được xác định. Trong hệ thống của chúng tôi, không chỉ là một phương pháp tăng cường dùng, mà còn lợi dụng phương pháp kết hợp biểu quyết để cải thiện kết quả của hệ thống. Cách của chúng tôi đã chứng minh được một sự khám cước gần trăm lớn so với vụ của tiền lớp khoản lớn.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft onze aanpak van SemEval-2018 Task 2, die gericht is op het voorspellen van de meest waarschijnlijke geassocieerde emoji, gegeven een tweet in het Engels of Spaans. We normaliseerden tekstgebaseerde tweets tijdens pre-processing, waarna we gebruikten van een bidirectionele gated recurrenting unit met een aandachtsmechanisme om ons basismodel te bouwen. Multimodellen met of zonder klassgewichten werden getraind voor de ensemble methodes. We hebben modellen zonder klassegewichten verbeterd en alleen sterke boost classificatoren werden geïdentificeerd. In ons systeem werd niet alleen een boosting methode gebruikt, maar we gebruikten ook de stemensemble methode om ons eindresultaat te verbeteren. Onze methode toonde een duidelijke verbetering aan van ongeveer 3% van de macro F1 score in het Engels en 2% in het Spaans.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашия подход към задача 2, която има за цел да предвиди най-вероятните свързани емоджи, дадени на английски или испански език. Нормализирахме текстово базираните туитове по време на предварителната обработка, след което използвахме двупосочно затворено повтарящо устройство с механизъм за внимание, за да изградим базовия модел. Многомодели с или без класови тежести бяха обучени за методите на ансамбъла. Увеличихме моделите без класове тежести и бяха идентифицирани само силни класове класификатори. В нашата система не само беше използван метод за повишаване, но и се възползвахме от метода на ансамбъла за гласуване, за да подобрим крайния резултат от системата. Нашият метод демонстрира очевидно подобрение от приблизително 3% от макроса на английски и 2% на испански.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores tilgang til SemEval-2018 Task 2, som har til formål at forudsige den mest sandsynlige tilknyttede emoji, givet et tweet på engelsk eller spansk. Vi normaliserede tekstbaserede tweets under forbehandling, hvorefter vi brugte en tovejsende gated recurent enhed med en opmærksomhedsmekanisme til at opbygge vores grundmodel. Multi-modeller med eller uden klassevægt blev trænet til ensemblemetoderne. Vi boostede modeller uden klassevægt, og kun stærke boost klassificerere blev identificeret. I vores system blev der ikke kun anvendt en boosting metode, men vi benyttede også stemmekonsemblemetoden til at forbedre vores endelige systemresultat. Vores metode viste en tydelig forbedring på ca. 3% af makro F1 score på engelsk og 2% på spansk.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup zadatku 2. polEval-2018, koji je cilj predvidjeti najvjerojatnije povezanije emoji, s obzirom na tweet na engleskom ili španjolskom jeziku. Normalizirali smo tweets na tekstu tijekom predobrazovanja, nakon čega smo iskoristili dvosmjernu povratnu jedinicu sa pažnjom mehanizam za izgradnju našeg osnovnog model a. Većina modela s težinom klase ili bez klase obučeni su za metode ensemble. Pojačali smo modele bez težine klase, a identificirani su samo jaki klasifikatori pojačanja. U našem sustavu, ne samo je korištena metoda pojačanja, već smo također iskoristili i metodu glasanja za poboljšanje rezultata našeg konačnog sustava. Naš metod je pokazao očigledno poboljšanje približno 3% makro F1 rezultata na engleskom i 2% na španjolskom.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18퀘스트2에 대한 우리의 방법을 묘사하는데 이 퀘스트는 가장 연관성이 있는 이모티콘을 예측하고 영어나 스페인어의 트윗을 제시하는 데 목적을 둔다.예처리 과정에서 우리는 텍스트를 바탕으로 하는 추문을 규범화시켰다. 그 다음에 우리는 주의 메커니즘을 가진 양방향 선택 순환 단원을 사용하여 우리의 기본 모델을 구축했다.집적 방법을 채택하여 유형적 중요성을 가지거나 가지지 않는 여러 모델을 훈련시켰다.우리는 클래스 권한이 없는 상황에서 모델을 강화하고 강력한 분류기만 식별했다.우리 시스템에서는 boosting 방법을 사용했을 뿐만 아니라 투표 집합 방법을 이용하여 최종 시스템 결과를 강화했다.우리의 방법은 영어와 스페인어에서 宏F1 점수가 각각 약 3%와 2% 높아졌다는 것을 나타낸다.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier beschreibt unseren Ansatz für SemEval-2018 Task 2, der darauf abzielt, das wahrscheinlichste assoziierte Emoji vorherzusagen, wenn ein Tweet auf Englisch oder Spanisch erscheint. Wir normalisierten textbasierte Tweets während der Vorverarbeitung, woraufhin wir eine bidirektionale Gated Recurrent Unit mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus nutzten, um unser Basismodell aufzubauen. Multimodelle mit oder ohne Klassengewichte wurden für die Ensemblemethoden trainiert. Wir haben Modelle ohne Klassengewichte erweitert und nur starke Boost-Klassifikatoren identifiziert. In unserem System wurde nicht nur eine Boosting-Methode verwendet, sondern wir nutzten auch die Voting-Ensemble-Methode, um unser Endergebnis zu verbessern. Unsere Methode zeigte eine deutliche Verbesserung von etwa 3% des Makro F1 Scores auf Englisch und 2% auf Spanisch.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ دستور ما را به کار ۲ نیم Eval-2018 توصیف می\u200cکند که هدف می\u200cکند پیش\u200cبینی کنیم که احتمالاً موجی\u200cترین ارتباط دارد، با توئیت به انگلیسی یا اسپانیایی داده می\u200cشود. ما تويت هاي متن رو طبيعي کرديم در طول پردازش پيش از اين، که بعد از اين از يه واحد دوراهي با يه مکانيسم توجه براي ساختن مدل پايگاه ما استفاده کرديم. مدل\u200cهای زیادی با یا بدون وزن کلاس برای روش\u200cهای انجمن آموزش داده شده\u200cاند. ما مدل\u200cها را بدون وزن کلاس تحویل دادیم، و تنها گروه\u200cهای تحویل قوی شناسایی شدند. در سیستم ما، نه تنها یک روش افزایش استفاده می\u200cشد، بلکه ما هم از روش انتخاب رای استفاده می\u200cکردیم تا نتیجه نهایی سیستم\u200cمان را افزایش دهیم. روش ما نشان داده است که تقریباً ۳ درصد امتیاز ماکرو F1 در انگلیسی و ۲ درصد در اسپانیایی بهتر شده است.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons toegang tot SemEval-2018 taak 2, wat doel om die mees waarskynlik geassosieerde emoji te voorskou, gegee 'n tweet in Engels of Spaanse. Ons normaliseer teks-gebaseerde tweete tydens voorafverwerking, volgens wat ons gebruik het 'n twee-rigting herhaalde eenheid met 'n aandag mekanisme om ons basis model te bou. Multi- models met of sonder klas weegte was opgelei vir die ensemble metodes. Ons het modele booster sonder klas gewigte, en slegs sterk boos klassifiseerders is identifiseer. In ons stelsel was nie net 'n boonstemmende metode gebruik nie, maar ons het ook voordeel van die stem ensemble metode geneem om ons eindelike stelsel resultaat te verbeter nie. Ons metode het 'n duidelike verbetering van omtrent 3% van die makro F1 punt in Engels en 2% in Spaanse bevestig.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mbinu yetu ya kazi ya SemEval-2018, inayokusudia kutabiri uwezekano mkubwa wa emoji, kwa kutumia twiti ya Kiingereza au Kihispania. Tulitumia twiti zilizotumwa kwa kutumia ujumbe wa maandishi wakati wa upasuaji wa kabla, ambapo tulitumia kituo kilichotumiwa kwa njia za mara mbili ambacho ni mfumo wa kusikiliza kujenga mtindo wetu wa msingi. Mifano mingi yenye ama bila mizani ya darasa walifundishwa kwa njia za upinzani. Tulifanya mifano bila mizani ya darasa, na wataalamu wenye nguvu tu walitambuliwa. In our system, not only was a boosting method used, but we also took advantage of the voting ensemble method to enhance our final system result.  Utawala wetu ulionyesha kuboreshwa kwa takribani asilimia 3 ya vituo vya F1 vya Kiingereza na asilimia 2 ya Kihispania.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz semiEval-2018 Görevi 2-ine golaýmyzy tassyýar. Bu biziň golaýymyzy iňlisçe ýa-da ispanyýaly tweet bilen berilen emoji täze tahmin etmek üçin maksady. Biz öňki işleýän durmuşda metin tabanly tweets diýipdir. Bu şekilde biziň baz modelimizi inşa etmek üçin iki yön gata bir tekrarly unit ulandyk. unit-format Biz klas ağırlygy bolmadyk nusgalary güýtgedik we diňe güýçli ýokary klasifikatçylar tanalypdyk. Biziň sistemimizde diňe ulanylýan ýokary taýýarlama yöntemi däldir, ýöne soňky sistemamyzyň netijesini geliştirmek üçin saýlamak üçin ýokary ulandyk. Biziň ýüregimiz iňlis dilinde 3% sany iňlis dilinde we 2% sany iňlis dilinde gelişmegi görkezildi.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የስምEval-2018 ስራ 2 መግለጫ ነው፡፡ አስቀድመን በተቃውሞ የጽሑፍ ትዊተቶችን አቀናብተናል፡፡ በክፍለ ሚዛን ሳይኖር ብዙዎችን ዓይነቶች ተማርተዋል፡፡ በክፍለ ሚዛን የሌለባቸው ምሳሌዎችን አበዛን እና ብርቱ የድምፅ ክፍተቶችን ብቻ ተገልጠናል፡፡ በሥርዓታችን፣ የመጨረሻው ስርዓታችንን ለመጨመር የተጠቀመው የድምፅ ስርዓት ብቻ አይደለም፡፡ ዘዴያችን በንግግሊዝኛ እና በስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ 3 በመቶ የሚካሄደውን ማክሮው F1 score እና 2 በመቶ የበለጠ ክፍል አስታወቀ፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր մոտեցումը ՍեմԷվալ-2018-ի 2-ի հանդեպ, որը նպատակում է կանխատեսել ամենահավանական կապված էմոջիները, հաշվի առնելով թվիթը անգլերեն կամ իսպաներեն: Մենք նորմալ էինք տեքստի վրա հիմնված թվիթերը նախընտրության ընթացքում, հետո մենք օգտագործեցինք երկու ուղղությամբ բացված կրկնվող միավոր ուշադրության մեխանիզմի հետ մեր հիմնական մոդելի կառուցելու համար: Շատ մոդելներ, որոնք ունեն կամ չունեն դասարանի կշիռ, սովորեցրել են համակարգչային մեթոդների համար: Մենք խրախուսեցինք մոդելները առանց դասարանի կշիռի, և միայն ուժեղ խրախուսեցին: In our system, not only was a boosting method used, but we also took advantage of the voting ensemble method to enhance our final system result.  Մեր մեթոդը ցույց տվեց, որ մոտավորապես 3 տոկոսի բարելավում է մակրո F1-ի գնահատականը անգլերենում և 2 տոկոսի իսպաներեն:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের দিকে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ বর্ণনা করেছে, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে সেখানে সবচেয়ে সম্ভাব্য যে ইমোজি সম্পর্কি পূর্ব প্রক্রিয়ার সময় আমরা লেখা ভিত্তিক টুইট স্বাভাবিকভাবে ব্যবহার করেছিলাম, যেখানে আমরা একটি বিদায়-সরাসরি পুনরাবারের প্রতিযোগিতা ইউনি ক্লাসের ওজন ছাড়া অনেক মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে। আমরা ক্লাসের ওজন ছাড়া মডেল বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছি, আর শুধু শক্তিশালী বুস্ট ব্লাস্ফিকাররা চিহ্নিত হয়েছে। আমাদের সিস্টেমে শুধুমাত্র একটি বোস্টিং পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করা ছিল না, কিন্তু আমরা ভোট দিয়েছিলাম শেষ ব্যবস্থার ফলাফল বৃদ্ধি করতে। আমাদের পদ্ধতি ইংরেজী এবং স্প্যানিশ ভাষায় প্রায় ৩% ম্যাক্রো এফ১ স্কোরের উন্নতি প্রদর্শন করেছে।', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan kita ke SemEval-2018 Task 2, yang bertujuan untuk memprediksi emoji yang paling mungkin terkait, diberikan tweet dalam bahasa Inggris atau Spanyol. We normalized text-based tweets during pre-processing, following which we utilized a bi-directional gated recurrent unit with an attention mechanism to build our base model.  Multi-models with or without class weights were trained for the ensemble methods.  We boosted models without class weights, and only strong boost classifiers were identified.  In our system, not only was a boosting method used, but we also took advantage of the voting ensemble method to enhance our final system result.  Our method demonstrated an obvious improvement of approximately 3% of the macro F1 score in English and 2% in Spanish.', 'sq': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 2, which aims to predict the most likely associated emoji, given a tweet in English or Spanish.  Ne normalizuam tweetet me bazë teksti gjatë paraprocesimit, pas të cilit përdorëm një njësi të përsëritur dydrejtuese me një mekanizëm vëmendje për të ndërtuar modelin tonë bazë. Shumë modele me apo pa pesha klase u trajnuan për metodat e ansamblit. Ne rritëm modelet pa pesha klase, dhe vetëm klasifikuesit e fortë të nxitjes u identifikuan. Në sistemin tonë, jo vetëm ishte një metodë nxitëse e përdorur, por ne gjithashtu shfrytëzuam metodën e ansamblit të votimit për të përmirësuar rezultatin tonë përfundimtar të sistemit. Our method demonstrated an obvious improvement of approximately 3% of the macro F1 score in English and 2% in Spanish.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš přístup k SemEval-2018 Task 2, jehož cílem je předpovědět nejpravděpodobnější související emoji, vzhledem k tweetu v angličtině nebo španělštině. Během předzpracování jsme normalizovali textové tweety, následně jsme pro sestavení základního modelu použili obousměrnou recidivující jednotku s mechanismem pozornosti. Pro souborové metody byly trénovány vícemodely s třídní váhou nebo bez ní. Posílili jsme modely bez třídní hmotnosti a byly identifikovány pouze silné boostové klasifikátory. V našem systému byla nejen použita metoda boostingu, ale také jsme využili metodu volebního souboru pro zlepšení konečného systémového výsledku. Naše metoda prokázala zřejmé zlepšení přibližně 3% makro F1 skóre v angličtině a 2% ve španělštině.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie lähenemisviisi SemEval-2018 ülesandele 2, mille eesmärk on ennustada kõige tõenäolisemaid seotud emojisid, antud säutsu inglise või hispaania keeles. Normaliseerisime eeltöötluse käigus tekstipõhiseid säutseid, seejärel kasutasime baasmudeli ehitamiseks kahesuunalist suletud korduvat üksust koos tähelepanumehhanismiga. Ansambli meetodite jaoks treeniti mitmemudeleid klassikaaluga või ilma. Me tõstsime mudeleid ilma klassikaaluta ja tuvastati ainult tugevad tõusuklassifikaatorid. Meie süsteemis ei kasutatud mitte ainult tõhustamismeetodit, vaid kasutasime ära ka hääletussensemble meetodit, et parandada oma lõpptulemust. Meie meetod näitas selget paranemist umbes 3% makro F1 skoorist inglise keeles ja 2% hispaania keeles.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan lähestymistapaamme SemEval-2018 Task 2 -tehtävään, jonka tavoitteena on ennustaa todennäköisimmin liittyvä emoji, kun twiitti annetaan englanniksi tai espanjaksi. Normalisoimme tekstipohjaiset tweetit esikäsittelyn aikana, minkä jälkeen rakensimme perusmallimme kaksisuuntaista suljettua toistuvaa yksikköä huomiomekanismilla. Ryhmämenetelmiin koulutettiin useita malleja, joissa oli tai ei ollut luokkapainoja. Tehostimme malleja ilman luokkapainoja, ja vain vahvat boost-luokitukset tunnistettiin. Järjestelmässämme käytettiin paitsi vahvistusmenetelmää, myös äänestysryhmämenetelmää parantaaksemme järjestelmän lopputulosta. Menetelmämme osoitti, että makro F1 -pistemäärä parani selvästi noin 3% englanniksi ja 2% espanjaksi.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim halımızı SemEval-2018 Task 2 tərzini təsbit edir. Bu, İngilizce və İspanyolca tweet edilən ən ən mümkün emoji tərzini təsbit etmək istəyir. Ön işləmə sırasında metin tabanlı twetləri normalizə etdik, bunun ardınca baz modelimizi inşa etmək üçün iki yönəli qaytarılmış bir birimi istifadə etdik. Sınıf ağırlığı ilə çoxlu modellər ensemble metodları üçün təhsil edilmişdir. Sınıf ağırlığı olmadan modelləri artırdıq və yalnız qüvvətli artıq klasifikatçıları tanındı. Sistemimizdə sadəcə istifadə edilən yüksək yol deyildi, lakin biz də son sistemimizin sonuçlarını artırmaq üçün səslərin ensemble metodlarından faydalandıq. Bizim metodumuz İngilizce F1 nöqtəsinin yaklaşık 3%-ini və İspanyolca 2%-ini göstərdi.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu el nostre enfocament a SemEval-2018 Task 2, que mira a predir les emoji més probablement associades, dada un tweet en anglès o espanyol. Vam normalitzar els tweets basats en text durant el pré-processament, segons els quals vam utilitzar una unitat recurrent bidireccional amb un mecanisme d'atenció per construir el nostre model base. Multi-models with or without class weights were trained for the ensemble methods.  Vam impulsar models sense pes de classe, i només van identificar classificadors forts. En el nostre sistema, no només es va utilitzar un mètode de reforç, sinó també vam aprofitar el mètode del conjunt de votacions per millorar el nostre resultat final del sistema. El nostre mètode va demostrar una millora òbvia d'aproximadament el 3% de la puntuació macro F1 en anglès i el 2% en espanyol.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup zadatku 2 od semiEval-2018, koji je cilj predvidjeti najvjerojatnije povezanije emoji, s obzirom na tweet na engleskom ili španjolskom jeziku. Normalizirali smo tweets na tekstu tijekom predobrazovanja, nakon čega smo iskoristili dvosmjernu povratnu jedinicu sa pažnjom mehanizam za izgradnju našeg baznog model a. Većina modela sa ili bez težine klase su obučeni za metode ensemble. Pojačali smo modele bez težine klase, a identificirani su samo jaki klasifikatori. U našem sistemu, ne samo je korištena metoda jačanja, već smo također iskoristili korist metode glasanja za poboljšanje rezultata našeg konačnog sistema. Naša metoda je pokazala očigledno poboljšanje približno 3% makro F1 rezultata na engleskom i 2% na španjolskom.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé iki rambaran ngerwih barêng nggambar sampek tanggal semebal-2008 task 2, iki dadi nggawe ngerasakno karo emuji sing apik dhéwé, nyimpen tuwit kanggo ingkang karo Spanyola. Monday politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntuk model sing wis ana luwih basa, lan akeh-uteg susahé iki dadi nèng. Nyong sistem-sistem sing wis rampun nggawe sistem dadi wis nggawe ngubah, dadi wis biasa nggawe sistem sing beraksi dadi nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing beraksi Awakdhéwé ngerasakno ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno kanggo 3% karo macro F1 kanggo kelas Inggris lan 2% Kasempan.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana hanyoyinmu zuwa Semevaal-2018 Tafiyar 2, da aimi ya yi bayani ko da ɗabi'a mafi yiwuwa masu haɗuwa da hisãbi, da aka yi wani juma'in Ingiriya ko Isbanish. Mun kawaici littattafai a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi a gaba-aiki, da kuma muka yi amfani da wani shirin da aka sake koma guda-hagu, da wani matsayin muhalli wa ya sami misalinmu. An sanar wa masu motsi masu yawa da ko kuma ba su iya nau'in fassarar. Mun ƙara misãlai da ba za'a sami nau'i ba, kuma an gane fasalar masu ƙarfi kawai. A cikin na'uranmu, ba ta zama wani metode mai boost wanda aka yi amfani ba, kuma amma mun sami amfani da shirin ayuka da za'a ƙara matsayinmu. Tayiyinmu ya nuna kodi mai bayani da taki 3% na'yan macro F1 score cikin Ingiriya da 2% cikin Isbanish.", 'he': "העיתון הזה מתאר את הגישה שלנו למשימה 2 של SemEval-2018, המטרה לחזות את האמוג'י הכי סביר שקשור, בהתחשב בטיוויט באנגלית או ספרדית. אנחנו נורמלים טוויטים מבוססים בטקסט במהלך העבודה הקדמית, בעקבותיהם השתמשנו ביחידה שתי כיוונים שעורה חוזרת עם מנגנון תשומת לב לבנות את המודל הבסיסי שלנו. דוגמנים רבים עם או ללא משקלים בכיתה הוכשרו לשיטות האנסמבל. הגדמנו דוגמנים ללא משקלי כיתה, ורק מסמכי דחף חזק הוזהו. במערכת שלנו, לא רק שיטת דחיפה השתמשת, אלא גם ניצלנו את שיטת אנסמבל ההצבעה כדי לשפר את תוצאת המערכת הסופית שלנו. השיטה שלנו הראה שיפור ברור של בערך 3% מהנקודת המקרו F1 באנגלית ו-2% בספרדית.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš pristop k SemEval-2018 nalogi 2, katerega cilj je napovedati najverjetnejše povezane emojije, ob tweetu v angleščini ali španščini. Med predobdelavo smo normalizirali besedilne tweete, nato pa smo uporabili dvosmerno zaprto ponavljajočo enoto z mehanizmom pozornosti za gradnjo osnovnega modela. Večmodeli z ali brez uteži so bili usposobljeni za metode ansambla. Izboljšali smo modele brez uteži razreda in identificirali smo le močne razvrstitvene klasifikatorje. V našem sistemu nismo uporabljali le metode povečanja, temveč smo izkoristili tudi metodo glasovalnega ansambla za izboljšanje končnega rezultata sistema. Naša metoda je pokazala očitno izboljšanje za približno 3% makro F1 rezultata v angleščini in 2% v španščini.', 'bo': 'ཤོག We normalized text-based tweets during pre-processing, following which we used a bi-directional gated recurrent unit with an attention mechanism to build our base model. དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཞེང་ཚད་ལ་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དག་གི་ཚད་ལ་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་མེད་པ། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཚད་མེད་དུ་སྤྱད་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་མིང་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱིས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་མིག་རྩལ་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'ar': 'DUTH في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية في التغريدات', 'es': 'DUTH en Semeval-2018 Tarea 2: predicción de emoji en tweets', 'fr': 'DUTH au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Prédiction des emoji dans les Tweets', 'pt': 'DUTH no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Previsão de emojis em tweets', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のDUTHタスク2 ：ツイートの絵文字予測', 'zh': 'DUTHňťĘSemEval-2018ňŐí2:ŠÄĘŠľçŔíĘŠâůšČŽňĆĚňŹá', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर DUTH: Tweets में इमोजी भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'DUTH на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Прогнозирование эмодзи в твитах', 'ga': 'DUTH ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Tuar Emoji in Tweets', 'ka': 'DUTH SemEval-2018 დავალება 2: Emoji წინაწერება Tweets-ში', 'hu': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji jóslás tweetekben', 'el': 'Δουλειά 2: Προβολές σε Τουίτερ για Εμόζι', 'it': 'DUTH a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Prediczione Emoji nei Tweet', 'lt': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'mk': 'ДУТ на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Предвидување на Емоја на Твитови', 'kk': 'DUTH 2- тапсырма: Твиттерде Emoji- тапсырмасы', 'ms': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: ഇമോജി പ്രിന്\u200dഷന്\u200d ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d', 'mt': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'mn': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'pl': 'DUTH na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Prognoza Emoji w Tweetach', 'no': 'DUTH ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2: Emoji- forordning i tweets', 'ro': 'DUTH la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Predicția emoțiilor în Tweets', 'sr': 'DUTH na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Emoji predviđanje u Tweets', 'sv': 'DUTH på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Emoji Prediction i Tweets', 'so': 'DUTH oo ku qoran SemEval-2018 Shaqada 2: Heeganka Emoji ee Tweets', 'si': 'DUTH සම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 2: Emobi ප්\u200dරධානය ට්විට්ස් වල', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 2: Emoji முன்னேற்றம்', 'ur': 'ڈوٹ ٹویٹ میں سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس ۲: ایموجی پیش بینی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'DUTH ở SemEvl-208 Task 2: mặc đoán Emoji trong Tweet', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Прогнозиране на емоджи в туитове', 'hr': 'DUTH na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Emoji predviđanje u Tweets', 'nl': 'DUTH op SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Emoji voorspelling in Tweets', 'da': 'DUTH på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Emoji forudsigelse i tweets', 'de': 'DUTH bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Emoji Vorhersage in Tweets', 'id': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'ko': 'DUTH가 SemEval-18 미션2: 트위터에서의 표정 예측', 'sw': 'DUTH kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 2: Utawala wa Emoji katika twita', 'fa': 'DUTH در کار ۲: پیشنهاد Emoji در Tweets', 'af': 'DUTH by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Emoji voorskrif in Tweets', 'tr': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'sq': 'DUTH në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'hy': 'Երկրորդ հանձնարարությունը՝ Էմոյի կանխատեսումը թվիթերում', 'am': 'ስራ 2: ኢዮጂ ፕሬዝርት በTweets', 'az': 'DUTH 2. G칬z톛l: Tweets i칞ind톛 Emoji Prediction', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২-এ ডিউথ: টুইটারে ইমোজি প্রেশন', 'bs': 'DUTH na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Emoji predviđanje u Tweets', 'ca': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets', 'cs': 'DUTH na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Emoji predikce ve tweetech', 'et': 'DUTH SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 2: Emoji prognoos tweets', 'fi': 'DUTH SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Emoji Ennuste Tweetsissä', 'jv': 'DUTH nang seminval-2008 task 2: emuji predikion in Two', 'sk': 'DUTH na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: Napoved emojev v Tweets', 'he': 'משימה 2:', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'DUTH at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Emoji Prediction in Tweets'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the approach that was developed for SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) by the DUTH Team. First, we employed a combination of pre-processing techniques to reduce the noise of tweets and produce a number of features. Then, we built several N-grams, to represent the combination of word and emojis. Finally, we trained our system with a tuned LinearSVC classifier. Our approach in the leaderboard ranked 18th amongst 48 teams.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النهج الذي تم تطويره لمهمة SemEval 2018 2 (توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات) من قبل فريق DUTH. أولاً ، استخدمنا مجموعة من تقنيات المعالجة المسبقة لتقليل ضوضاء التغريدات وإنتاج عدد من الميزات. بعد ذلك ، قمنا ببناء العديد من N-grams لتمثيل مزيج الكلمات والرموز التعبيرية. أخيرًا ، قمنا بتدريب نظامنا باستخدام مصنف LinearSVC مضبوط. احتل نهجنا في لوحة المتصدرين المرتبة 18 من بين 48 فريقًا.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit l'approche qui a été développée pour SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) par l'équipe DUTH. Tout d'abord, nous avons utilisé une combinaison de techniques de prétraitement pour réduire le bruit des tweets et produire un certain nombre de fonctionnalités. Ensuite, nous avons créé plusieurs N-grammes, pour représenter la combinaison de mots et d'émojis. Enfin, nous avons entraîné notre système avec un classificateur LinearSvc réglé. Notre approche dans le classement s'est classée 18e parmi 48 équipes.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a abordagem desenvolvida para a Tarefa 2 do SemEval 2018 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) pela equipe DUTH. Primeiro, empregamos uma combinação de técnicas de pré-processamento para reduzir o ruído dos tweets e produzir uma série de recursos. Em seguida, construímos vários N-grams, para representar a combinação de palavra e emojis. Por fim, treinamos nosso sistema com um classificador LinearSVC ajustado. Nossa abordagem na tabela de classificação ficou em 18º lugar entre 48 equipes.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe el enfoque desarrollado para la Tarea 2 de SemEval 2018 (Predicción multilingüe de emojis) por el equipo de DUTH. En primer lugar, empleamos una combinación de técnicas de preprocesamiento para reducir el ruido de los tuits y producir una serie de funciones. Luego, creamos varios N-gramas para representar la combinación de palabras y emojis. Finalmente, entrenamos nuestro sistema con un clasificador LinearSVC ajustado. Nuestro enfoque en la tabla clasificatoria ocupó el puesto 18 entre 48 equipos.', 'ja': '本稿では、DUTHチームがSemEval 2018 Task 2 （ Multilingual Emoji Prediction ）のために開発したアプローチについて述べる。まず、ツイートのノイズを減らし、いくつかの機能を生み出すために、前処理技術の組み合わせを採用しました。そして、単語と絵文字の組み合わせを表現するために、いくつかのNグラムを構築しました。最後に、チューニングされたLinearSVC分類器でシステムをトレーニングしました。ランキングでの私たちのアプローチは、48チーム中18位でした。', 'zh': '本文引DUTH团队为SemEval 2018 Task 2(多言表情符号占)开发之法。 先我用预处理术以损推文噪音而生功能。 然后构数N-grams,以表单词表情符号之组。 最后,我们用经过调谐的 LinearSVC 分类器训练我们的系统。 在排行榜之法,在48团队中排名第18位。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर उस दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है जिसे DUTH टीम द्वारा SemEval 2018 टास्क 2 (बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी) के लिए विकसित किया गया था। सबसे पहले, हमने ट्वीट्स के शोर को कम करने और कई सुविधाओं का उत्पादन करने के लिए पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण तकनीकों के संयोजन को नियोजित किया। फिर, हमने शब्द और इमोजी के संयोजन का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए कई एन-ग्राम बनाए। अंत में, हमने अपने सिस्टम को एक ट्यून किए गए LinearSVC क्लासिफायर के साथ प्रशिक्षित किया। लीडरबोर्ड में हमारा दृष्टिकोण 48 टीमों के बीच 18 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается подход, который был разработан для задачи 2 SemEval 2018 (Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи) командой DUTH. Во-первых, мы использовали комбинацию методов предварительной обработки для снижения шума твитов и создания ряда функций. Затем мы построили несколько N-грамм, чтобы представить комбинацию слова и эмодзи. Наконец, мы обучили нашу систему с настроенным классификатором LinearSVC. Наш подход в таблице лидеров занял 18-е место среди 48 команд.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcur chuige a d’fhorbair Foireann DUTH do Thasc 2 SemEval 2018 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction). Ar dtús, d’úsáideamar teaglaim de theicnící réamhphróiseála chun torann tweets a laghdú agus chun roinnt gnéithe a tháirgeadh. Ansin, thógamar roinnt N-gram, chun an teaglaim de fhocal agus emojis a léiriú. Ar deireadh, chuireamar oiliúint ar ár gcóras le haicmitheoir LinearSVC tiúnta. Bhí ár gcur chuige ar an gclár ceannairí san 18ú háit i measc 48 foireann.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την προσέγγιση που αναπτύχθηκε για την εργασία 2 (Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη εμόζι) από την ομάδα του DUTH. Πρώτον, χρησιμοποιήσαμε έναν συνδυασμό τεχνικών προεπεξεργασίας για να μειώσουμε το θόρυβο των tweets και να παράγουμε μια σειρά χαρακτηριστικών. Στη συνέχεια, φτιάξαμε αρκετά Ν-γραμμάρια, για να αντιπροσωπεύουν τον συνδυασμό λέξης και εμότζι. Τέλος, εκπαιδεύσαμε το σύστημά μας με ένα συντονισμένο ταξινομητή LinearSVC. Η προσέγγισή μας στην κατάταξη κατατάχθηκε 18η μεταξύ των 48 ομάδων.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერა პროგრამა, რომელიც DUTH ჯგუფის განვითარებული SemEval 2018 დავალებისთვის მეორე (მრავალენგური Emoji წინასწორება). პირველად, ჩვენ დავამუშავეთ წინაპროცესის ტექნოგიების კომბიზაცია, რომელიც გადავამუშავებთ ტვიტების ხმას და გავამუშავებთ რამდენიმე ფუნქ შემდეგ, ჩვენ N-გრამის კომბიზაციას დავიყენეთ, რომ გამოსახულებთ სიტყვას და ემიზების კომბიზაციას. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემის შესწავლეთ სისტემის კლასიფიკაცია LinearSVC-ზე. ნაქთჲრ ოპთჟლვე გჲეთრვლნთჲრ ბჲპე პანეთპა 18-რთ ჲრ 48 რთმა.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a DUTH Team által a SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) számára kidolgozott megközelítést. Először is előfeldolgozási technikák kombinációját alkalmaztuk a tweetek zajának csökkentésére és számos funkció előállítására. Ezután építettünk néhány N-grammot, hogy ábrázoljuk a szó és az emojik kombinációját. Végül a rendszerünket egy hangolt LinearSVC osztályozóval képeztük. Megközelítésünk a ranglistán a 18. helyen állt a 48 csapat közül.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive l'approccio sviluppato per SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) dal team DUTH. In primo luogo, abbiamo utilizzato una combinazione di tecniche di pre-elaborazione per ridurre il rumore dei tweet e produrre una serie di funzionalità. Poi, abbiamo costruito diversi N-grammi, per rappresentare la combinazione di parola ed emoji. Infine, abbiamo addestrato il nostro sistema con un classificatore LinearSVC sintonizzato. Il nostro approccio nella classifica si è classificato 18esimo tra 48 squadre.", 'lt': 'This paper describes the approach that was developed for SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) by the DUTH Team.  Pirma, mes naudojome parengiamojo apdorojimo metodų derinį, kad sumažintume tweetų triukšmą ir sukurtume keletą požymių. Tada sukūrėme keletą N-gramų, kad parodytume žodžio ir emodžių derinį. Galiausiai apmokėme savo sistemą su pritaikytu LinearSVC klasifikatoriumi. Mūsų požiūris vadovaujančioje taryboje buvo 18-asis iš 48 komandų.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува пристапот кој беше развиен за SemEval 2018 задача 2 (Мултијазична емојска предвидба) од страна на тимот DUTH. Прво, употребивме комбинација на преобработувачки техники за намалување на бучавата на твитови и произведување на голем број карактеристики. Потоа направивме неколку Н-грами, за да ја претставиме комбинацијата на зборот и емоџии. Конечно, го трениравме нашиот систем со лајнарSVC класификатор. Нашиот пристап во водечката табла се рангираше на 18-тото место меѓу 48 тимови.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan yang telah dikembangkan untuk SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) oleh Pasukan DUTH. Pertama, kami menggunakan kombinasi teknik praproses untuk mengurangi bunyi tweet dan menghasilkan beberapa ciri-ciri. Kemudian, kami membina beberapa N-gram, untuk mewakili kombinasi perkataan dan emoji. Akhirnya, kami melatih sistem kami dengan penyesuaian LinearSVC. pendekatan kita di papan pemimpin tertinggal ke-18 di antara 48 pasukan.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз DUTH тобының 2- ші тапсырма (көп тілді эмози бағдарламасы) үшін жасалған жағдайды анықтайды. Біріншіден, біз tweets дыбысты азайту және бірнеше мүмкіндіктерді жасау үшін алдын- процессердің технологияларын жасадық. Содан кейін бірнеше N-грамм құрылдық, сөз мен эмозиялардың жинағын көрсету үшін. Соңында, біз жүйемізді LinearSVC классификаторымен оқыдық. Біздің лидер буферіндегі тәсіліміз 48 топтардың 18-ші ретінде.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dപ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളുടെ ശബ്ദം കുറയ്ക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ഒരു കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടത്തി പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ച് N-ഗ്രാമുകള്\u200d പണിതു, വാക്കും ഇമോജിസിന്റെയും കൂട്ടിക്കാണാന്\u200d. അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിച്ചത് ഒരു ലൈനിയര്\u200dഎസ്\u200cവിസി ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d ആയി. നേതാവിന്\u200dറെ ബോര്\u200dഡില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ അടുത്തുചെല്ലുന്നത് 48 ടീം കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d 18 മാത്രമാണ്.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-approċċ li ġie żviluppat għal SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) mit-Tim DUTH. L-ewwel nett, impjegajna taħlita ta’ tekniki ta’ qabel l-ipproċessar biex inaqqsu l-istorbju tat-tweets u jipproduċu għadd ta’ karatteristiċi. Imbagħad, inbnew diversi N-grammi, biex jirrappreżentaw il-kombinazzjoni ta’ kelma u emoji. Fl-a ħħar nett, aħna mħarrġin is-sistema tagħna b’klassifikatur LinearSVC aġġustat. L-approċċ tagħna fit-tabella ta’ tmexxija kellu t-18-il post fost 48 tim.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje podejście opracowane dla SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Wielojęzyczna Prognoza Emoji) przez Zespół DUTH. Po pierwsze, zastosowaliśmy połączenie technik wstępnego przetwarzania, aby zmniejszyć hałas tweetów i uzyskać szereg funkcji. Następnie zbudowaliśmy kilka N-gramów, aby reprezentować kombinację słowa i emoji. Wreszcie przeszkoliliśmy nasz system z dostrojonym klasyfikatorem LinearSVC. Nasze podejście w klasyfikacji zajęło się 18-tą wśród 48-tych drużyn.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь ДUTH багийн SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) болон SemEval-ын талаар хөгжсөн аргыг тайлбарладаг. Эхлээд бид түүхийн чимээ багасгаж, олон сонирхолтой боловсруулахын тулд өмнө үйлдвэрлэлийн техникуудыг ашигласан. Дараа нь бид хэдэн N-грамм бүтээсэн үг болон эмужийн нэгтгэлийг илэрхийлдэг. Эцэст нь бид системийг LinearSVC классификацтай суралцаж өгсөн. Манай удирдагч буудалд 48 багийн 18-р багтай байлаа.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie abordarea dezvoltată pentru SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingval Emoji Prediction) de echipa DUTH. În primul rând, am folosit o combinație de tehnici de pre-procesare pentru a reduce zgomotul tweeturilor și pentru a produce o serie de caracteristici. Apoi, am construit mai multe N-grame, pentru a reprezenta combinația de cuvânt și emojis. În cele din urmă, am instruit sistemul nostru cu un clasificator LinearSVC reglat. Abordarea noastră în clasament s-a clasat pe locul 18 în rândul celor 48 de echipe.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver tilnærminga som er utvikla for semiEval 2018 oppgåve 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) av DUTH-gruppa. Først har vi arbeidet eit kombinasjon av førehandsamingsteknikk for å redusera støyet på tweets og produsera mange funksjonar. Så bygge vi fleire N-gramer for å representere kombinasjonen av ordet og emojis. I slutt har vi lært systemet vårt med ein tunert linearSVC-klassifisering. Tilnærminga vårt i lederbordet rangerte 18. mellom 48 grupper.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ DUTH කණ්ඩායමෙන් සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩකරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරවේශයක් විස්තර කරනවා. මුලින්ම, අපි ට්විට් වල ශබ්දය අඩු කරන්න පුරුද්ධ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවක් සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ. ඊට පස්සේ, අපි N-ග්\u200dරාම්ස් වල් සහ එමෝජිස් වල සංවිධානය කරනවා. අන්තිමේදි, අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය පුහුණුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ LinearSVC විශේෂකයෙක්. අපේ පිළිගත්ත ප්\u200dරවේශයක් කණ්ඩායම් 48 අතර 18වෙනි ප්\u200dරවේශයක්.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa qaababka loo hormariyey SemEval 2018 Shaqada 2 (Divorsion of luuqadaha badan ee Emoji) ee kooxda DUTH. First, we employed a combination of pre-processing techniques to reduce the noise of tweets and produce a number of features.  Markaas waxaan dhisnay dhawr N-gram, si aan u representno wadanka hadalka iyo emojiska. Ugu dambaysta waxaan nidaamka ku tababarinnay fasax la mid ah LinearSVC. Dhaqdhaqaalaha hogaamiyayaashayada ayaa ka mid ahaa 18aad oo ka mid ah 48 koox.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup koji je razvio DUTH tim za zadatak 2. za semiEval 2018 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction). Prvo smo zaposlili kombinaciju tehnika pre obrade da smanjimo buku tweeta i proizvodimo broj karakteristika. Onda smo izgradili nekoliko N-grama da predstavimo kombinaciju riječi i emojis. Konačno smo trenirali sistem sa naslovnim klasifikatorom LinearSVC-a. Naš pristup u vodećoj tabli je bio 18. između 48 tima.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver det tillvägagångssätt som utvecklats för SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Flerspråkig Emoji Prediction) av DUTH Team. Först använde vi en kombination av förbehandlingstekniker för att minska bruset från tweets och producera ett antal funktioner. Sedan byggde vi flera N-gram, för att representera kombinationen av ord och emojis. Slutligen tränade vi vårt system med en inställd LinearSVC klassificerare. Vårt tillvägagångssätt i rankningslistan rankades 18:e bland 48 lag.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the approach that was developed for SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) by the DUTH Team. پہلے ہم نے ٹویٹوں کی آواز کاٹنے اور بہت سی فرصت پیدا کرنے کے لئے پیش پردازی ٹیکنیک کی پیدائش کی۔ پھر ہم نے چند N-گرم بنائے، کلمات اور ایموجیس کی ترکیب کے لئے۔ آخر میں، ہم نے اپنے سیستم کو ایک تنظیم لینیارSVC کلاسیر کے ساتھ آموزش دی۔ ہمارا رئیڈربورڈ کی تقریبا 48 تیموں میں 18م درجہ تھا۔', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்வால் 2018 செயல் 2 (பல மொழி எமாஜி முன்னேற்றம்) உருவாக்கப்பட்ட செயலை விவரிக்கிறது DUTH குழுவால். முதலில், நாங்கள் முன் செயல்படுத்தும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் ஒலி குறைக்க மற்றும் சில குணங்களை உருவாக்க ஒரு சேர்த்து வ வார்த்தையும் உணர்வுகளையும் குறிப்பிட வேண்டிய சில N-கிராம்களை உருவாக்கினோம். இறுதியில், நாங்கள் எங்கள் கணினியை ஒரு துண்டிக்கப்பட்ட கோடுகள் SVC வகுப்பாளருடன் பயிற்சி செய்தோம். எங்கள் தலைப்புபலகையில் நிறுவனம் 48 குழுக்களில் 18வது நிறுவப்பட்டது.', 'uz': "Bu hujjat DUTH guruhi SemEval 2018 Vazifa 2 (Multi-tillar Emoji Diqqat) uchun yaratilgan usulni anglatadi. Birinchi so'zda, biz Twitterlarning tovushlarini kamaytirish uchun bir necha xususiyatlarni ishlaymiz. Keyin biz so'zlar va emojis bir qancha N-gram tuzishni yaratdik. Endi biz tizimimizni bir qanday bog'liq Line SVC fasifiyatlari bilan o'rganamiz. Our approach in the leaderboard ranked 18th amongst 48 teams.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả phương pháp đã được phát triển cho nhiệm vụ Semkhai mạc 208 (khai thác đa ngôn ngữ dãy Emoji) của đội DUTH. Thứ nhất, chúng tôi đã sử dụng một loạt các kỹ thuật xử lý trước để giảm tiếng ồn của tweet và tạo ra một số đặc điểm. Sau đó, chúng tôi tạo ra vài N-grams, để đại diện cho sự kết hợp của từ và biểu tượng. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi đào tạo hệ thống bằng một phân loại LinearSVC. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi ở bảng xếp hạng 18th trong vài đội 48.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup koji je razvio DUTH tim za zadatak 2. za semiEval 2018 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction). Prvo smo zaposlili kombinaciju tehnika predobrazovanja kako bi smanjili buku tweets i proizveli broj karakteristika. Onda smo izgradili nekoliko N-grama kako bi predstavili kombinaciju riječi i emojis. Konačno smo obučili naš sistem s našim klasifikacijom LinearSVC-a. Naš pristup u vodičnoj ploči bio je 18. između 48 tima.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва подхода, разработен за задача 2 (многоезична прогноза за емоджи) от екипа на ДУТ. Първо, използвахме комбинация от техники за предварителна обработка, за да намалим шума от туитове и да създадем редица функции. След това построихме няколко Н-грама, за да представяме комбинацията от дума и емоджи. Накрая обучихме нашата система с настроен класификатор. Подходът ни в класацията се класира на 18-о място сред 48 отбора.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver den tilgang, der blev udviklet til SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) af DUTH Team. For det første anvendte vi en kombination af forbehandlingsteknikker for at reducere støjen fra tweets og producere en række funktioner. Derefter byggede vi flere N-gram, som repræsenterer kombinationen af ord og emojis. Endelig trænede vi vores system med en tunet LinearSVC klassificering. Vores tilgang i ranglisten rangerede 18. blandt 48 hold.', 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft de aanpak die is ontwikkeld voor SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) door het DUTH Team. Eerst gebruikten we een combinatie van pre-processing technieken om de ruis van tweets te verminderen en een aantal functies te produceren. Vervolgens bouwden we verschillende N-grammen, om de combinatie van woord en emoji's weer te geven. Tot slot hebben we ons systeem getraind met een afgestemde LinearSVC classificator. Onze aanpak in het klassement scoorde 18e onder de 48-teams.", 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan pendekatan yang dikembangkan untuk SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) oleh Tim DUTH. First, we employed a combination of pre-processing techniques to reduce the noise of tweets and produce a number of features.  Kemudian, kami membangun beberapa N-gram, untuk mewakili kombinasi kata dan emoji. Akhirnya, kami melatih sistem kami dengan Klasifikasi LinearSVC. pendekatan kami di papan pemimpin tertinggi ke-18 diantara 48 tim.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt den Ansatz, der vom DUTH Team für SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) entwickelt wurde. Zunächst haben wir eine Kombination von Vorverarbeitungstechniken verwendet, um das Rauschen von Tweets zu reduzieren und eine Reihe von Funktionen zu produzieren. Dann bauten wir mehrere N-Gramm, um die Kombination von Wort und Emojis darzustellen. Schließlich trainierten wir unser System mit einem abgestimmten LinearSVC-Klassifikator. Unser Ansatz in der Bestenliste rangierte 18.unter den 48-Teams.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mbinu iliyoandaliwa kwa ajili ya SemEval 2018 Kazi 2 (Udhibiti wa lugha nyingine) na timu ya DUTH. Kwanza, tulitumia muunganiko wa mbinu za kabla ya kuchukua hatua za kupunguza sauti za twiti na kutengeneza vipengele kadhaa. Kisha, tulijenga vifaa kadhaa vya N-gram, kuwakilisha muungano wa maneno na emojis. Mwisho, tulifundisha mfumo wetu kwa mfanyakazi wa simu za SVC. Matokeo yetu katika kiongozi yalikuwa na rangi ya 18 kati ya timu 48.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روش را توصیف می\u200cکند که توسط تیم DUTH برای تابع ۲ (پیشنهاد Emoji Multilingual) در سال ۲۰۱۸ توسعه شده است. اول، ما یک ترکیب از تکنیک پیش پردازش برای کاهش صدای توئیت و تولید تعدادی از ویژه ها استخدام کردیم. بعدش چند گرم N را ساختیم تا ترکیب کلمه و احساسات را نشان دهیم. بالاخره، ما سیستم\u200cمون را با یک راهنمایی LinearSVC آموزش دادیم. دستور ما در صفحه رئيس 18 درجه بين 48 تيم بود', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 2018-nji SemEval Taýgy 2-nji (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) tarapyndan döwletlenýän nusgany çykarýar. Birinjisi, tweets sesini azaltmak we birnäçe üýtgetmek üçin önlemek tekniklerini işledik. Sonra birkaç N-gramı oluşturduk ve kelime ve emojis kombinasyonunu göstermek için. - - Soňunda biz sistemimizi düzümlenmiş LinearSVC klasifikatçy bilen eğitirdik. Meniň lider taýýarlarymyzda 48 toparyň arasynda 18-nji derejesi bardy.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die toegang wat vir SemEval 2018 taak 2 ontwikkel is (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) deur die DUTH-Team. Eerste het ons 'n kombinasie van voorafverwerking-teknike gebruik om die geluid van tweets te verminder en 'n aantal funksies te produseer. Dan het ons verskeie N-grame gebou om die kombinasie van woord en emojis te verteenwoordig. Eindelik, ons het ons stelsel opgelei met 'n tuned LinearSVC klassifiseerder. Ons toegang in die leierbord het 18de rangeer tussen 48 teams.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan qasjen që u zhvillua për SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) nga ekipi DUTH. Së pari, ne përdorëm një kombinim të teknikave paraprocesuese për të reduktuar zhurmën e tweeteve dhe për të prodhuar një numër elementesh. Pastaj, ne ndërtuam disa N-gram, për të përfaqësuar kombinimin e fjalës dhe emojis. Më në fund, kemi trajnuar sistemin tonë me një klasifikues LinearSVC. Përqasja jonë në bordin kryesor u rendit e 18-ta midis 48 ekipave.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለሴmEval 2018 ስራ 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) የተዘጋጀውን ሥርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ መጀመሪያ የTwitteets ድምፅ ለማጎድልበት እና ብዙ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር አስቀድመን የነበረውን ጥያቄዎችን አቀረብን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የቃልና የኢሜጂ ግንኙነት ለመቆጣጠር ብዙ ከ-ግራም ሠራን፡፡ በመጨረሻም ሲስተማርን በመስመር ላይ የኢንተርSVC መግለጫን አስተማርነው፡፡ የመራዳው ቦርድ ውስጥ መግቢያችን 18ኛ ከ48 ቡድን መካከል ተለይቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'This paper describes the approach that was developed for SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) by the DUTH Team.  Առաջինը, մենք օգտագործեցինք նախավերամշակման մեթոդների համակցությունը, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք թվիթերի աղմուկը և ստեղծենք մի շարք հատկություններ: Հետո մենք կառուցեցինք մի քանի N-գրամ, որպեսզի ներկայացնենք բառի և էմոջայի համադրությունը: Վերջապես, մենք մեր համակարգը սովորեցրեցինք լայնացված Լինարար ՍՎՍ դասակարգչի միջոցով: Մեր մոտեցումը առաջնորդների մոտ դասակարգված էր 48 թիմերի 18-րդ մասում:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ডিউথ টিমের দ্বারা সেমভাল ২০১৮ টাস্ক ২ (বহুভাষাভাষী ইমোজি প্রেশন) তৈরি করা কোন উপায়ের ব্যাখ্যা করেছে। প্রথমত, আমরা টুইটের কণ্ঠস্বর কমিয়ে দেবার জন্য পূর্ব প্রক্রিয়ার প্রযুক্তির একটি সংযুক্ত কৌশল কাজ করেছি এবং বেশ কয়েকটি বি তারপর আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি এন-গ্রাম বানিয়েছিলাম, শব্দ এবং ইমোজিকের সম্মিলনের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার জন্য। শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছিলাম লিনিয়ারSVC ক্লাসিফারের সাথে। Our approach in the leaderboard ranked 18th amongst 48 teams.', 'az': "Bu kağıt, DUTH Ekibi'nin SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) üçün hazırlanmış tərzini təsdiqləyir. Birincisi, twet səsini azaltmaq və bir neçə fəaliyyəti ürəkləmək üçün ön işləmə teknikləri birləşdirdik. Sonra bir neçə N-gram inşa etdik, söz və emojis kombinasyonunu göstərək. Sonunda sistemimizi LinearSVC klasifikatıyla təhsil etdik. Bizim lider dağındakı yaxınlığımız 48 dəstədən 18 dərəcə idi.", 'ko': '본고는 DUTH팀이 SemEval 2018 퀘스트 2(다국어 이모티콘 예측)를 위해 개발한 방법을 묘사한다.우선, 우리는 일련의 예처리 기술을 채택하여 추문의 소음을 낮추고 특징을 형성했다.그리고 우리는 단어와 표정을 나타내는 몇 개의 N-gram을 구축했다.마지막으로, 우리는 조정된 LinearSVC 분류기로 우리 시스템을 훈련시켰다.우리의 방법은 48개 팀 중 18위다.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup koji je razvio DUTH tim za zadatak 2. za semiEval 2018 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction). Prvo smo zaposlili kombinaciju tehnika predobrazovanja kako bi smanjili buku tweeta i proizveli broj karakteristika. Onda smo izgradili nekoliko N-grama da predstavimo kombinaciju riječi i emojis. Konačno smo trenirali naš sistem sa naslovnim klasifikatorom LinearSVC-a. Naš pristup u vodećoj tabli je 18. reda između 48 tima.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu l'enfocament desenvolupat per SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) per l'equip DUTH. Primer, vam utilitzar una combinació de tècniques de pré-processament per reduir el soroll dels tweets i produir una sèrie de característiques. Després vam construir varis N-grams, per representar la combinació de paraula i emoji. Finalment, vam entrenar el nostre sistema amb un classificador LinearSVC. El nostre enfocament a la taula de líder es va classificar al 18è entre 48 equips.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje přístup, který byl vyvinut pro SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) týmem DUTH. Nejprve jsme použili kombinaci technik předzpracování, abychom snížili šum tweetů a vytvořili řadu funkcí. Pak jsme vytvořili několik N-gramů, které reprezentují kombinaci slova a emoji. Nakonec jsme vyškolili náš systém s vyladěným klasifikátorem LinearSVC. Náš přístup v žebříčku zařadil osmnáctý mezi 48 týmy.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse lähenemisviisi, mille DUTH meeskond töötas välja SemEval 2018 ülesande 2 (mitmekeelne emoji prognoos) jaoks. Esiteks kasutasime eeltöötlustehnikate kombinatsiooni, et vähendada säutsude müra ja luua mitmeid funktsioone. Seejärel ehitasime mitu N-grammi, et esindada sõna ja emojide kombinatsiooni. Lõpuks treenisime oma süsteemi häälestatud LinearSVC klassifikaatoriga. Meie lähenemine edetabelis oli 48 meeskonna seas 18. kohal.', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa kuvataan DUTH-tiimin SemEval 2018 Task 2 (Multilingual Emoji Prediction) -tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n kehittﾃ､mﾃ､ﾃ､ lﾃ､hestymistapaa. Ensin kﾃ､ytimme esikﾃ､sittelytekniikoiden yhdistelmﾃ､ﾃ､ tweettien melun vﾃ､hentﾃ､miseksi ja useiden ominaisuuksien tuottamiseksi. Sitten rakensimme useita N-grammoja edustamaan sanan ja hymiﾃｶiden yhdistelmﾃ､ﾃ､. Lopuksi koulutimme jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme viritetyllﾃ､ LinearSVC-luokituksella. Lﾃ､hestymistapamme tulostaulukossa sijoittui 18. sijalle 48 joukkueen joukossa.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun yana bayyana hanyarsa wanda aka developed wa SemEV 2018 Task 2 (Kullum Emoji Prediction) na GUT. Kayya, mun yi aiki komi da takayaki masu gaba-aiki dõmin mu ƙara saurin Twitter kuma mu samu wasu masu hushi. Sa'an nan kuma muka gina na N-gram guda, dõmin su yi mataimaki da maganar da Emoji. Ya ƙarshe, muka sanar da na'urarmu da wani mai daraja na LineSV C. Mataimakinmu a cikin mashinar nan na danganta 18th daga jama'a 48.", 'he': "הנייר הזה מתאר את הגישה שפותחה עבור SemEval 2018 משימה 2 (תחזוי Emoji רבולוגי) על ידי צוות DUTH. ראשית, השתמשנו בשילוב של טכניקות לפני העבודה כדי להפחית את הרעש של טוויטים וליצור מספר תכונות. ואז בנינו מספר N-גרם, כדי לייצג את שילוב המילה ואמוג'ים. סוף סוף, אימנו את המערכת שלנו עם מסגר ליינאר SVC מתאים. הגישה שלנו בלוח המנהיגה הגיעה ל-18 בין 48 קבוצות.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan pristop, ki ga je ekipa DUTH razvila za nalogo 2 SemEval 2018 (večjezična napoved emojev). Najprej smo uporabili kombinacijo tehnik predobdelave za zmanjšanje hrupa tweetov in izdelavo številnih funkcij. Nato smo zgradili več N-gramov, ki predstavljajo kombinacijo besede in emojijev. Nazadnje smo naš sistem trenirali z nastavljenim klasifikatorjem LinearSVC. Naš pristop v lestvici lestvic je med 48 ekipami uvrstil 18. mesto.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki dipertuju akeh dadi nggawe kanggo seminval 2020 task 2 (Multilanguage emuji predikion) nang DUTH Group. Awak dhéwé, ngéwé éntukno sistem sing perusahaan mrogras-perusahaan kanggo nggawe barang tuyte kuwi tindakan kesalahan kanggo mbala nggawe politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ero, dhewe kelas sistem iki dadi kelas barang kelas LineSVC Ndheke dhéwé sing paling kelas kuwi 18 lan 48e sampek.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་DUTH ཚོ་ཁག་གི་འཇིག་སྣོད་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་ཡོད། དང་པོ་བརྗེད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ནད་ཡིན་པས། དེ་ནས་ངེད་ཚོས་N(grams)ཅིག་བྲིས་པ་དེ་ཚིག་དང་སྒྲུང་གཏོང་གི་མཉམ་དུ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་དགོས། མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མ་ལག་ལ་རིམ་ལ་སྒྲིག་གི་LinearSVC དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཕྱོགས་སྐོར་གྱི་དཔོན་རིགས་ནང་དུ་ཚོགས་སྡེབ་ཕྱོགས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་གནད་དོན་དག་༨།'}
{'en': 'Duluth UROP at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversampling', 'ar': 'Duluth UROP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات مع التعلم الجماعي والإفراط في أخذ العينات', 'fr': "Duluth UROP au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Prédiction d'emoji multilingue avec apprentissage d'ensemble et suréchantillonnage", 'es': 'Duluth UROP en la tarea 2 de SemEval-2018: Predicción multilingüe de emojis con aprendizaje conjunto y sobremuestreo', 'pt': 'Duluth UROP no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Previsão de emojis multilíngues com aprendizado conjunto e sobreamostragem', 'ja': 'Duluth UROP at SemEval -2018タスク2 ：アンサンブル学習とオーバーサンプリングによる多言語絵文字予測', 'zh': '德卢斯UROP在SemEval-2018务2:有集成学采样多言表情符号占', 'ru': 'Duluth UROP на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи с ансамблемным обучением и чрезмерной выборкой', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 टास्क 2 पर Duluth UROP: Ensemble Learning और Oversampling के साथ बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी', 'ga': 'Duluth UROP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Tuar Emoji Ilteangach le Foghlaim Ensemble agus Róshampláil', 'ka': 'Duluth UROP semiEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversample', 'hu': 'Duluth UROP a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Többnyelvű emoji jóslás együttes tanulással és túlmintázással', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη με εκμάθηση συνόλων και υπερδειγματοληψία', 'kk': 'Қосымша UROP 2- тапсырмасында: Қосымша оқу және үлкен мәліметтерді алдын- ала көп тілді эмози көздері', 'it': 'Duluth UROP a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Prediczione Emoji multilingue con Ensemble Learning e Oversampling', 'lt': 'Duluth UROP SemEval-2018 2 užduotis: Daugiakalbis emojo prognozė su bendru mokymusi ir pernelyg dideliu mėginių ėmimu', 'mk': 'Дулут УРОП на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Мултијазична предвидување на емои со ансембелно учење и препримерување', 'ms': 'Duluth UROP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversampling', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2-ല്\u200d ദുലുത്ത് യൂര്\u200dപ്പ്: ഏന്\u200dസെമിള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും മാറ്റാമാലിങ്ങുന്നതുമായി പല ഭാഷക്', 'mn': 'Duluth UROP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversample', 'mt': 'Duluth UROP f’SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversampling', 'no': 'Duluth UROP på halvEval-2018 oppgåve 2: Multispråk emoji- forhåndsvising med forskjellig læring og oversprøving', 'pl': 'Duluth UROP w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Wielojęzyczne prognozowanie emoji z uczeniem się zespołu i nadmiernym próbkowaniem', 'ro': 'Duluth UROP la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Predicția emoji multilingvă cu învățarea ansamblului și supraeșantionarea', 'sr': 'Duluth UROP na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversample', 'si': 'Duluth UROP at Half-2018 Job 2: Multilanguage Emobi Precdiction with Ensemble Training and oversample', 'so': 'Duluth UROP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Prediction of Emoji luuqado badan with Ensemable Learning and Oversameyn', 'sv': 'Duluth UROP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Flerspråkig Emoji Prediction med Ensemble Learning och Översampling', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் துலுத்து UROP 2: ஒற்றை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் மேல் மாதிரியும் பல மொழி எமோயி முன்னாட்சி', 'ur': 'دولوٹ یوروپ نیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۲: بہت سی زبان ایموجی پیش بینی', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifani Duuth UROP 2: Oʻrganish va Aloqani sampli bilan bir necha tillar Emoji Predictionary', 'vi': 'Dulles urgo tại SemEvl-208 Task 2: dự đoán đa ngôn ngữ của Emoji với Ensemble Learning and Oversample.', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Предвиждане на многоезични емоджи с изучаване на ансамбъл и свръхизвадка', 'da': 'Duluth UROP på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Flersproget emoji forudsigelse med Ensemble Learning og Oversampling', 'hr': 'Duluth UROP na pola ispitivanja 2018. zadatak 2: višejezička predviđanja emoji s učenjem i preuzorakom uzoraka', 'nl': 'Duluth UROP bij SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Meertalige Emoji Voorspelling met Ensemble Leren en Oversampling', 'id': 'Duluth UROP di SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversampling', 'ko': '델루스 우로프(Duluth UROP)가SemEval-18 회의에서의 임무2: 통합 학습과 샘플링을 사용하여 다국어 표정 예측', 'fa': 'دولوت UROP در ماموریت ۲۰۱۸: پیشنهاد اموژی\u200cهای زیادی با یادگیری و نمونه\u200cهای فراوانی', 'de': 'Duluth UROP bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 2: Mehrsprachige Emoji-Vorhersage mit Ensemble Learning und Oversampling', 'tr': 'Duluth UROP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversample', 'af': 'Duluth UROP by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Veelvuldige Emoji voorskrif met Ensemble Learning and Oversampling', 'sq': 'Duluth UROP në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversampling', 'am': 'አድራሻ UROP at SemEval-2018 ስራ 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learn and Oversampling', 'sw': 'Duluth UROP katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 2: Utawala wa Emoji wa lugha nyingi na Ufunzi na Ujumbe', 'az': 'Duluth UROP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversample', 'bs': 'Duluth UROP na pola evaluacije 2018. zadatak 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversample', 'ca': 'Duluth UROP a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversampling', 'cs': 'Duluth UROP na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Vícejazyčná předpověď emoji s učením souborů a nadměrným vzorkováním', 'et': 'Duluth UROP SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: mitmekeelne emoji prognoos koos ansambli õppe ja üleproovidega', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের দুলুথ ইউরোপ ২: শিক্ষা এবং অতিরিক্ত নম্বরের সাথে বহুভাষী এমোজি প্রেকশন', 'fi': 'Duluth UROP SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Monikielinen Emoji Ennuste Ensemble Learning ja Oversampling', 'hy': 'Դուլյութ ԵՄՕՊ-ը ՍեմԷվալ-2018-ի 2. խնդիր. բազլեզու Էմոյի կանխատեսումը միանգամայն սովորելու և չափազանց շատ նմուշներ վերցնելու միջոցով', 'jv': 'Duluh URL OP nang seminval-2008 task 2: Multilanguage emuji predikion with ENsemble Learning and Osampling', 'he': 'Duluth UROP ב SemEval-2018 משימה 2: Prediction Emoji Multilingual with Ensemble Learning and Oversampling', 'sk': 'Duluth UROP na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: Napoved večjezičnih emojijev z učenjem ansambla in prevelikim vzorčenjem', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'bo': 'Duluth UROP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction with Ensemble Learning and Oversampling'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the Duluth UROP systems that participated in SemEval2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. We relied on a variety of ensembles made up of classifiers using Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression, and Random Forests. We used unigram and bigram features and tried to offset the skewness of the data through the use of oversampling. Our task evaluation results place us 19th of 48 systems in the English evaluation, and 5th of 21 in the Spanish. After the evaluation we realized that some simple changes to our pre-processing could significantly improve our results. After making these changes we attained results that would have placed us sixth in the English evaluation, and second in the Spanish.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة أنظمة Duluth UROP التي شاركت في SemEval – 2018 Task 2 ، Multilingual Emoji Prediction. لقد اعتمدنا على مجموعة متنوعة من المجموعات المكونة من المصنفات باستخدام Naive Bayes ، والانحدار اللوجستي ، والغابات العشوائية. استخدمنا ميزات unigram و bigram وحاولنا تعويض انحراف البيانات من خلال استخدام الإفراط في أخذ العينات. تضعنا نتائج تقييم المهام لدينا في المركز التاسع عشر من بين 48 نظامًا في تقييم اللغة الإنجليزية ، والخامس من أصل 21 في اللغة الإسبانية. بعد التقييم أدركنا أن بعض التغييرات البسيطة على المعالجة المسبقة لدينا يمكن أن تحسن نتائجنا بشكل كبير. بعد إجراء هذه التغييرات ، توصلنا إلى النتائج التي كانت ستضعنا في المركز السادس في تقييم اللغة الإنجليزية والثانية في اللغة الإسبانية.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe los sistemas UROP de Duluth que participaron en la Tarea 2 de Semeval — 2018, Predicción multilingüe de emojis. Confiamos en una variedad de conjuntos compuestos por clasificadores que utilizaban Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression y Random Forests. Utilizamos características de unigramas y bigramas e intentamos compensar la asimetría de los datos mediante el uso de sobremuestreo. Los resultados de nuestra evaluación de tareas nos sitúan en el puesto 19 de 48 sistemas en la evaluación en inglés y en el 5° de 21 en el español. Después de la evaluación, nos dimos cuenta de que algunos cambios simples en nuestro procesamiento previo podrían mejorar significativamente nuestros resultados. Después de hacer estos cambios, obtuvimos resultados que nos habrían colocado en el sexto lugar en la evaluación de inglés y en segundo lugar en el español.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit les systèmes UROP de Duluth qui ont participé à SEMEVAL—2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Nous nous sommes appuyés sur une variété d'ensembles composés de classificateurs utilisant Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression et Random Forests. Nous avons utilisé des caractéristiques d'unigramme et de bigramme et avons essayé de compenser l'asymétrie des données par le biais d'un suréchantillonnage. Les résultats de notre évaluation des tâches nous placent 19e sur 48 systèmes dans l'évaluation en anglais et 5ème sur 21 dans l'évaluation espagnole. Après l'évaluation, nous avons réalisé que de simples modifications apportées à notre prétraitement pouvaient améliorer considérablement nos résultats. Après avoir apporté ces modifications, nous avons obtenu des résultats qui nous auraient placés au sixième rang de l'évaluation en anglais et au deuxième rang de l'évaluation en espagnol.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve os sistemas Duluth UROP que participaram da Tarefa 2 do SemEval–2018, Previsão de emojis multilíngues. Contamos com uma variedade de conjuntos compostos de classificadores usando Naive Bayes, Regressão Logística e Florestas Aleatórias. Usamos recursos de unigrama e bigrama e tentamos compensar a assimetria dos dados por meio do uso de sobreamostragem. Nossos resultados de avaliação de tarefas nos colocam em 19º de 48 sistemas na avaliação em inglês e 5º de 21 em espanhol. Após a avaliação percebemos que algumas mudanças simples em nosso pré-processamento poderiam melhorar significativamente nossos resultados. Depois de fazer essas mudanças, obtivemos resultados que nos colocariam em sexto lugar na avaliação em inglês e em segundo em espanhol.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Predictionに参加したDuluth UROPシステムについて説明する。ナイーブベイズ、ロジスティック回帰、ランダムフォレストを使用して、分類子で構成されたさまざまなアンサンブルに依存しました。ユニグラムとビッグラム機能を使用し、オーバーサンプリングを使用してデータの歪みを相殺しようとしました。課題評価結果は、英語評価では48系統中19位、スペイン語評価では21系統中5位です。評価後、事前処理の簡単な変更により、結果が大幅に改善される可能性があることに気づきました。これらの変更を行った後、私たちは英語評価で6位、スペイン語評価で2位になる結果を得ました。', 'zh': '本文言参SemEval-2018务2,多言表情符号占德卢斯UROP系统。 吾赖于分类器成诸融合,合用素贝叶斯,逻辑归林。 用单边形、双面体特征,并试用过采样以抵数偏度。 我们的事务评估使我们在英语估的48个系统中排名第19位,在西班牙语估中排名第5位。 评估后,我们意识到对预处理行简易的改易可以显着改善的。 既有所定,使在英语评中第六,在西班牙语中第二。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описываются системы Duluth UROP, которые участвовали в задаче 2 SemEval-2018 «Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи». Мы полагались на различные ансамбли, состоящие из классификаторов, используя Наив Байес, Логистическую регрессию и Случайные леса. Мы использовали функции unigram и bigram и пытались компенсировать асимметрию данных с помощью чрезмерной выборки. Наши результаты оценки задач ставят нас на 19-е место из 48 систем в английской оценке и на 5-е место из 21 системы в испанском. После оценки мы поняли, что некоторые простые изменения в нашей предварительной обработке могут значительно улучшить наши результаты. После внесения этих изменений мы достигли результатов, которые бы поставили нас на шестое место в английской оценке и на второе место в испанском.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर Duluth UROP सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जो SemEval-2018 टास्क 2, बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी में भाग लिया था। हम भोले Bayes, रसद प्रतिगमन, और यादृच्छिक वनों का उपयोग कर क्लासिफायर से बना ensembles की एक किस्म पर भरोसा किया. हमने यूनिग्राम और बिगरम सुविधाओं का उपयोग किया और ओवरसैम्पलिंग के उपयोग के माध्यम से डेटा के तिरछेपन को ऑफसेट करने की कोशिश की। हमारे कार्य मूल्यांकन परिणाम हमें अंग्रेजी मूल्यांकन में 48 प्रणालियों में से 19 वें स्थान पर रखते हैं, और स्पेनिश में 21 में से 5 वें स्थान पर हैं। मूल्यांकन के बाद हमने महसूस किया कि हमारे पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण में कुछ सरल परिवर्तन हमारे परिणामों में काफी सुधार कर सकते हैं। इन परिवर्तनों को करने के बाद हमने परिणाम प्राप्त किए जो हमें अंग्रेजी मूल्यांकन में छठे स्थान पर रखते थे, और स्पेनिश में दूसरे स्थान पर थे।', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chórais Duluth UROP a ghlac páirt i dTasc 2 SemEval-2018, Prediction Emoji Ilteangach. Bhraith muid ar ensembles éagsúla comhdhéanta d'aicmitheoirí ag baint úsáide as Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression, agus Random Forests. D’úsáideamar gnéithe unigram agus bigram agus rinneamar iarracht sceáltacht na sonraí a fhritháireamh trí róshampláil a úsáid. Cuireann ár dtorthaí meastóireachta tascanna sinn sa 19ú háit as 48 córas sa mheastóireacht Bhéarla, agus sa 5ú háit as 21 sa Spáinnis. Tar éis na meastóireachta thuig muid go bhféadfadh roinnt athruithe simplí ar ár réamhphróiseáil feabhas suntasach a chur ar ár gcuid torthaí. Tar éis na hathruithe seo a dhéanamh bhaineamar torthaí amach a chuirfeadh sa séú háit sa mheastóireacht Bhéarla sinn, agus sa dara háit sa Spáinnis.", 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს Duluth UROP სისტემებს, რომლებიც SemEval-2018 დაწყვეტილი 2-ში, მრავალენგური Emoji წინასწორებაში. ჩვენ განვითარებულია განსხვავებული კლასიფიკაციებისგან გამოყენებული ნეიბი, ლოგისტიკური რეგრესი და პანენტური ფორმები. ჩვენ უნიგრამის და ბიგრამის ფუნქციების გამოყენება და მონაცემების შეცდომა გადატანა მონაცემების შეცდომის გამოყენება. ჩვენი სამუშაო შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი გავამუშავება 48 სისტემის 19-ე და 21-ის 5-ე შონელში. განსაზღვრების შემდეგ ჩვენ გავიგეთ, რომ რამდენიმე საუკეთესო ცვლილებები ჩვენი პროცესის წინასწორად შეგვიძლია გაუკეთოთ ჩვენი შედეგი. შემდეგ ეს ცვლილებების შემდეგ, ჩვენ მივიღეთ შედეგი, რომელიც ჩვენ შვიდი წარმოდგენა ანგლისური განსაზღვრებაში და მეორე შვიდი შვიდი წარმოდგენა.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja azokat a Duluth UROP rendszereket, amelyek részt vettek a SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Számos olyan együttesre támaszkodtunk, amelyek a Naive Bayes, a Logisztikai Regression és a Random Forests osztályozókból állnak. Unigram és bigram funkciókat használtunk, és megpróbáltuk ellensúlyozni az adatok merevségét a túlminősítés használatával. A feladatértékelési eredményeink szerint a 48 rendszer közül 19., a spanyol nyelven pedig 21-ből 5. Az értékelés után rájöttünk, hogy az előfeldolgozás néhány egyszerű változtatása jelentősen javíthatja eredményeinket. Ezeket a változtatásokat követően olyan eredményeket értünk el, amelyek hatodik lett volna az angol értékelésben, második pedig a spanyol értékelésben.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τα συστήματα που συμμετείχαν στην εργασία 2, Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη εμόζι. Βασιστήκαμε σε μια ποικιλία συνόλων αποτελούμενων από ταξινομητές χρησιμοποιώντας Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression και Τυχαία Δάση. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε χαρακτηριστικά μονογραφήματος και διγραφήματος και προσπαθήσαμε να αντισταθμίσουμε την κλίση των δεδομένων μέσω της χρήσης υπερδειγματοληψίας. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης εργασιών μας τοποθετούν το 19ο από τα 48 συστήματα στην αγγλική αξιολόγηση και το 5ο από το 21 στα ισπανικά. Μετά την αξιολόγηση διαπιστώσαμε ότι κάποιες απλές αλλαγές στην προεπεξεργασία μας θα μπορούσαν να βελτιώσουν σημαντικά τα αποτελέσματά μας. Μετά την πραγματοποίηση αυτών των αλλαγών πετύχαμε αποτελέσματα που θα μας έβαζαν έκτους στην αγγλική αξιολόγηση και δεύτερους στα ισπανικά.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive i sistemi UROP Duluth che hanno partecipato a SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Ci siamo affidati a una varietà di ensemble composti da classificatori che utilizzano Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression e Random Forests. Abbiamo usato le caratteristiche di unigram e bigram e abbiamo cercato di compensare lo sbilanciamento dei dati attraverso l'uso di oversampling. I risultati della valutazione dei compiti ci collocano al diciannovesimo di 48 sistemi nella valutazione inglese e al quinto di 21 in spagnolo. Dopo la valutazione ci siamo resi conto che alcune semplici modifiche alla nostra pre-elaborazione potrebbero migliorare significativamente i nostri risultati. Dopo aver apportato questi cambiamenti abbiamo ottenuto risultati che ci avrebbero piazzati sesto nella valutazione inglese e secondo in quella spagnola.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomos Duluth UROP sistemos, kurios dalyvavo 2 SemEval-2018 užduotyje „Daugiakalbė emojų prognozė“. Mes pasikliovėme įvairiais komplektais, sudarytais iš klasifikatorių, naudojančių Naive Bayes, logistinę regresiją ir atsitiktinius miškus. Naudojome unigram ų ir bigram ų savybes ir bandėme kompensuoti duomenų trūkumą naudojant per didelio masteliavimo. Mūsų užduočių vertinimo rezultatai įtraukia mus į anglų kalbos vertinimą 19-ąją iš 48 sistemų, o 5-ąją iš 21-osios – ispanų kalba. Po vertinimo supratome, kad kai kurie paprasti mūsų išankstinio perdirbimo pakeitimai galėtų gerokai pagerinti mūsų rezultatus. Padarę šiuos pakeitimus pasiekėme rezultatus, kurie padėtų mums šeštą kartą atlikti anglų kalbos vertinimą, o antrą - ispanų kalba.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2- тапсырмасында қатысу үшін бірнеше тілді эмози алдындағы Duluth UROP жүйелерін таңдайды. Біз Naive Bayes, Logistical Regression және Кездейсоқ Омандықтар қолданатын классификациялық енземблердің түрлі енземблеріне сендік. Біз униграмма және биграмма қасиеттерін қолданып, деректердің маңыздылығын өзгертуге тырыстық. Біздің тапсырмаларымызды бағалау нәтижесіміз ағылшын тілінде 19-ші 48 жүйелерді және 21-тің 5-ші испандықта болады. Біз оқиғадан кейін біз алдын- ала өзгерістеріміздің нәтижелерімізді өзгертуге мүмкін болады деп ойладық. Бұл өзгерістерді жасап, біз ағылшын дәрежесінде алтыншылық нәтижелерді, екіншіден испандықта болатын.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ги опишува системите DULUTH UROP кои учествуваа во SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Се потпиравме на различни ансембли составени од класификатори кои користат Најв Бејс, логистичка регресија и случајни шуми. Користевме униграмски и биграмски карактеристики и се обидовме да ја надокнадиме скриеноста на податоците преку употреба на препримерување. Нашите резултати од проценката на задачите не ставаат 19 од 48 системи во англиската проценка, а 5 од 21 на шпански. После проценката сфативме дека некои едноставни промени во нашето препроцесирање би можеле значително да ги подобрат нашите резултати. Откако ги направивме овие промени, постигнавме резултати кои ќе не ставеа шесто во англиската проценка, а второ на шпански.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem UROP Duluth yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Kami bergantung pada pelbagai kumpulan yang dibuat dari klasifikasi menggunakan Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression, dan Random Forests. Kami menggunakan ciri-ciri unigram dan bigram dan cuba untuk ofset kelemahan data melalui menggunakan penyampilan berlebihan. Hasil penilaian tugas kami meletakkan kami ke-19 dari 48 sistem dalam penilaian Inggeris, dan ke-5 dari 21 dalam bahasa Sepanyol. Setelah penilaian kami sedar bahawa beberapa perubahan sederhana dalam proses awal kami boleh meningkatkan keputusan kami dengan signifikan. Setelah membuat perubahan ini kami mendapat keputusan yang akan menempatkan kita ke-6 dalam penilaian Inggeris, dan kedua dalam bahasa Sepanyol.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2, പല ഭാഷ എമോജി മുന്\u200dഗണനിര്\u200dണ്ണയത്തില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന ഡുലുത്ത് യൂറോപ് സിസ്റ്റം  നാവ് ബെയ്സ്, ലോഗിസ്റ്റിക് റിഗ്രസ്സിക് കാടുകളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ ഒരുപാട് കാട്ടുകള ഞങ്ങള്\u200d യൂണിഗ്രാമിന്റെയും ബിഗ്രാമിന്റെയും പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്ക്യൂണിസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് അതിന്റ ഞങ്ങളുടെ ജോലി വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വിലാസവും സ്പാനിഷില്\u200d 21 ലെ 5th ലും ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. പരിഗണിക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം നമ്മള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കിയിരുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മുന്\u200dപ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ചില സാധാരണ മാ After making these changes we attained results that would have placed us sixth in the English evaluation, and second in the Spanish.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction-д оролцсон Duluth UROP системийг тайлбарладаг. Бид Naive Bayes, Logistics Regression, Random Forests ашиглаж буй олон хэлбэрээр бүтээгдэхүүнээс хамаарч байлаа. Бид униграмм, биграмм чанарыг ашиглаж өгөгдлийн санамсаргүй байдлыг гайхалтай ашиглаж үзсэн. Бидний ажлын оюутнууд бидэнд Англи хэлний оюутнуудад 48 системийн 19-нд, 21-ын 5-нд Испанид байдаг. Үүнийг үнэлэхээр бид өмнө үйлдвэрлэлийн зарим энгийн өөрчлөлт бидний үр дүнг үнэхээр сайжруулж чадна гэдгийг ойлгосон. Эдгээр өөрчлөлтийг хийсний дараа бид Англи хэлний дүгнэлт дахин зургааны үр дүн гарч ирсэн. Хоёрдугаар нь Испан хэлний хэлний хэлний хэлний хэлбэрээр.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje systemy Duluth UROP, które uczestniczyły w SemEval-2018 Task 2, Wielojęzyczne Emoji Prediction. Opieraliśmy się na różnorodnych zespołach składających się z klasyfikatorów z wykorzystaniem Naive Bayes, Regresji Logistycznej i Lasów Losowych. Użyliśmy funkcji unigramowych i bigramowych i staraliśmy się zrównoważyć skość danych poprzez zastosowanie oversamplingu. Nasze wyniki oceny zadań umieszczają nas dziewiętnastym z 48 systemów w ocenie angielskiej, a piątym z 21 w języku hiszpańskim. Po ocenie zdaliśmy sobie sprawę, że kilka prostych zmian w naszym przetwarzaniu wstępnym mogą znacznie poprawić nasze wyniki. Po dokonaniu tych zmian osiągnęliśmy wyniki, które umieściłyby nas szóstym miejscem w ocenie angielskiej, a drugim w hiszpańskim.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemele UROP Duluth care au participat la SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingval Emoji Prediction. Ne-am bazat pe o varietate de ansambluri alcătuite din clasificatori folosind Bayes Naive, Regresie Logistică și Păduri Aleatorii. Am folosit caracteristici unigrame și bigrame și am încercat să compensăm neclaritatea datelor prin utilizarea suprasamplării. Rezultatele evaluării sarcinilor noastre ne plasează pe locul 19 din 48 de sisteme în evaluarea în limba engleză și pe locul 5 din 21 în limba spaniolă. După evaluare am realizat că unele modificări simple la pre-procesarea noastră ar putea îmbunătăți semnificativ rezultatele noastre. După ce am făcut aceste schimbări am obținut rezultate care ne-ar fi plasat pe locul șase în evaluarea engleză și pe locul doi în spaniolă.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver Duluth- UROP- systemet som delta i semiEval- 2018 oppgåve 2, fleirspråk Emoji- forordning. Vi har tilbakekalla på mange ensembler som er lagt av klassifiserar med Naive Bayes, Logistical Regression og Tilfeldig Forests. Vi brukte unigram- og bigram- funksjonar og prøvde å forskyva skjønnen av data gjennom bruken av oversampling. Vårt oppgåvevurdering plasserer oss 19. av 48 system i engelsk evaluering, og 5. av 21 i spansk. Etter evalueringa vart vi oppdaga at nokre enkle endringar i forhandlinga vår kunne betydelig forbedra resultatet våre. Etter å gjera desse endringane, fikk vi resultata som ville ha sett oss sekste i anglesevalueringa, og andre i spanske.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sisteme Duluth UROP-a koji su sudjelovali u zadatku 2. iz semiEvala-2018, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Oslanjali smo se na razne ensemble sastavljene od klasifikatora koristeći Naive Bayes, Logističku regresiju i Random Forests. Koristili smo unigram i velike karakteristike i pokušali da prebacimo kost podataka kroz korištenje nadširenja. Naša procjena zadataka nas čini 19. od 48 sistema u engleskoj procjeni, i 5. od 21 na španjolskom. Nakon procjene shvatili smo da bi neke jednostavne promene našeg predobrazovanja mogle značajno poboljšati naš rezultat. Nakon što smo napravili te promene, postigli smo rezultate koji bi nas stavili šesti u Englesku procenu, a drugo na španjolski.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ දුලුත් UROP පද්ධතිය පැහැදිලි කරනවා සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩේ 2, ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධානය. අපි නායිව් බේස්, ලෝජිස්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ රැන්ඩෝම් වර්ගයක් පාවිච්චි කරලා තියෙන විවිධ සංවිධාන අපි යුනිග්\u200dරාම් සහ බිග්රාම් අවශ්\u200dයය භාවිතා කරලා තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න උත්සාහ කළා. අපේ වැඩේ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අපිට ඉංග්\u200dරීසි විශ්ලේෂණයේ පද්ධතියක් අංග්\u200dරීසි අංග්\u200dරාණ අවශ්\u200dයාවට පස්සේ අපි තේරුම් ගත්තා අපේ පිරිසිද්ධාවට සරල වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. මේ වෙනස් කරපු පස්සේ අපිට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබුණා, ඒ වගේම අපිට ඉංග්\u200dරීසි විශ්ලේෂණයේ හතරවෙනි තියෙන', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka duluth UROP ee ka qayb galay Shaqada SemEval-2018, Heeganka luuqadaha badan ee Emoji. Waxaannu ku kalsoonaynaa dabiicado kala duduwan oo lagu sameeyo Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression and Random Woods. We used unigram and bigram features and tried to offset the skewness of the data through the use of oversampling.  Qiimeynta shaqadeedu waxay nooga dhigtaa 19aad oo ka mid ah 48 nidaam oo afka Ingiriiska lagu qiimeeyo iyo 5aad oo Isbanish ku qoran Isbaanishka. Kadib qiimeynta kadib waxaynu ogaanay in qaar isbedelka fudud ee baaraandegistayada horay ay ay ku bedelan karto resultinnayada. Markii aan beddeladan ka dib ayaannu helay resulti, taas oo ah mid lix ka dhigay qiimeynta afka Ingiriiska, mid labaadna Isbanishka.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver Duluth UROP-system som deltog i SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Vi förlitade oss på en mängd olika ensembler bestående av klassificerare som använder Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression och Random Forests. Vi använde unigram- och bigramfunktioner och försökte kompensera skeynen i data genom att använda översampling. Våra utvärderingsresultat placerar oss 19:e av 48 system i den engelska utvärderingen och 5:e av 21 på spanska. Efter utvärderingen insåg vi att några enkla förändringar i vår förbehandling avsevärt kunde förbättra våra resultat. Efter att ha gjort dessa förändringar uppnådde vi resultat som skulle ha placerat oss sjätte i den engelska utvärderingen och tvåa i den spanska.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 2, பல மொழி எமோயி முன்னுரிமையில் பங்கிடப்பட்ட ட டுலுத்து யுஆரோப் அமைப்புகளை விளக்குகிறது. நாம் வகுப்பாளர்கள் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பல்வேறு குழுக்களை நம்பிக்கை கொண்டோம் நாவ் பேய்ஸ், Logistic Regression, மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட க நாங்கள் யுனிக்ராம் மற்றும் பிக்ராம் குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தினோம் மற்றும் மேலும் உபயோகித்து தரவின் வெளியீட்ட எங்கள் பணியின் மதிப்பீடு முடிவுகள் 48 முறைமைகளில் 19வது ஆங்கிலத்தின் மதிப்பில் எங்களை வைத்து, ஸ்பானிஷ் 21-ல் 5வது. சில எளிய மாற்றங்கள் எங்கள் முன் செயல்படுத்தலுக்கு முன்னால் மாற்றங்கள் முடியும் என்பதை நாங்கள் அறிந்து கொண இந்த மாற்றங்களை செய்யும் பிறகு நாங்கள் முடிவுகளை அடைந்தோம் அது ஆங்கிலத்தின் மதிப்பில் ஆறு வைத்துள்ளது, மற்ற', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistemi Duluth UROP li pparteċipaw f’SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Abbażajna fuq varjetà ta’ ensembles magħmulin minn klassifikaturi li jużaw Naive Bayes, Regressjoni Loġistika, u Foresti Random. Aħna użajna karatteristiċi unigrammi u bigrammi u ppruvajna tpatti l-iżvantaġġ tad-dejta permezz tal-użu ta’ kampjunar żejjed. Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni tagħna tal-kompiti jqiegħduna fid-19 minn 48 sistema fl-evalwazzjoni Ingliża, u fil-5 minn 21 fl-Ispanjol. Wara l-evalwazzjoni irrikonoxxejna li xi bidliet sempliċi fil-preipproċessar tagħna jistgħu jtejbu b’mod sinifikanti r-riżultati tagħna. Wara li għamilna dawn il-bidliet kisbna riżultati li kienu jpoġġuna s-sitt fl-evalwazzjoni Ingliża, u t-tieni fl-Ispanjol.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ Duluth UROP سیسٹم کی توصیف کرتا ہے جو SemEval-2018 ٹاکس 2 میں شریک ہوتی ہے، Multilingual Emoji Prediction. ہم نے نایو بیز، لوجیسٹی ریگرس اور رندام جنگل کے مطابق طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر ہم نے یونیگرام اور بیگرام کی خصوصیات استعمال کی اور دکھائی کے استعمال کے ذریعہ دکھانے کی کوشش کی۔ ہماری تابع ارزیابی کا نتیجہ ہم کو انگلیسی ارزیابی میں 48 سیستموں میں 19 اور 21 کی پنجم اسپانیایی میں رکھتا ہے اس ارزیابی کے بعد ہم نے سمجھ لیا کہ ہمارے پیش پرسس میں کچھ سادہ بدلوں ہمارے نتائج اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں۔ یہ تغییرات بنانے کے بعد ہم نے نتیجے پہنچ گئے جو ہمیں چھٹا انگلیسی ارزیابی میں ڈال دیں گے اور دوسرا اسپانیایی میں۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval-2018 Vazifa 2, Multilingua Emoji Predictionary Duluth UROP tizimini anglatadi. Biz Naiv Bayes, Logistik Regression va Tasodifik Forest yordamida turli sinfrlar yaratilgan bir necha misollariga ishlatamiz. Biz unigram va bigram xususiyatlaridan foydalanamiz va ko'proq foydalanish orqali maʼlumotning hayotini olishga harakat qildik. Vazifaning qiymatlarimiz natijalarimiz bizni ingliz tilidagi 19 tizimning 19 chi qiymatlarimizga va Ispancha 21 chi 5 chi yilda boshlaydi. Tasavvur qilishdan keyin biz bir necha oddiy o'zgarishlarimiz oldin jarayonlarimizga o'zgarishlarimiz natijalarimizni juda ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu o'zgarishlarni o'zgartirishdan keyin biz ingliz tilida 6 ta'lim qiymatni va Ispanchada ikkinchi so'zni o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống Duluth hoành hành của Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task 2, đa ngôn ngữ tấn công Emoji. Chúng tôi dựa vào một số kết hợp được bao gồm các phân loại bằng Nai Bayes, Điều Hồi giáo lôgíc, và Random Forests. Chúng tôi sử dụng các tính năng của đô-la và bắn lớn và cố gắng bù đắp độ lệch của các dữ liệu bằng cách dùng quá lượng. Kết quả đánh giá nhiệm vụ của chúng tôi đặt chúng tôi vào số tám tám tám hệ thống 48... Sau khi đánh giá chúng tôi nhận ra rằng một vài thay đổi đơn giản trong quá trình xử lý có thể cải thiện đáng kể. Sau khi thay đổi này, chúng tôi đã có kết quả thứ sáu trong bài đánh giá Anh, và thứ hai là ở Tây Ban Nha.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва системите, участвали в задача 2, многоезична прогноза за емоджи. Разчитахме на разнообразие от ансамбли, съставени от класификатори, използващи Нейв Байес, Логистична регресия и Случайни гори. Използвахме униграм и биграм функции и се опитахме да компенсираме изкривяването на данните чрез използването на свръхпрожектиране. Резултатите от оценката на задачите ни поставят на 19-та от 48 системи в английската оценка и на 5-та от 21 в испанската. След оценката осъзнахме, че някои прости промени в предварителната обработка могат значително да подобрят резултатите ни. След като направихме тези промени постигнахме резултати, които щяха да ни поставят на шесто място в английската оценка и второ в испанската.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de Duluth UROP systemen die deelnamen aan SemEval-2018 Task 2, Meertalige Emoji Prediction. We vertrouwden op een verscheidenheid van ensembles bestaande uit classificatoren met behulp van Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression en Random Forests. We gebruikten unigram en bigram functies en probeerden de scheefheid van de gegevens te compenseren door gebruik te maken van oversampling. Onze resultaten van taakvoordeling plaatsen ons 19e van 48-systemen in de Engelse evaluatie en 5e van 21 in het Spaans. Na de evaluatie realiseerden we ons dat enkele eenvoudige wijzigingen in onze voorbewerking onze resultaten aanzienlijk konden verbeteren. Na het doorvoeren van deze veranderingen bereikten we resultaten die ons op de zesde plaats zouden hebben geplaatst in de Engelse evaluatie en op de tweede plaats in het Spaans.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt die Duluth UROP Systeme, die an SemEval-2018 Task 2, Mehrsprachige Emoji Vorhersage teilgenommen haben. Wir setzten auf eine Vielzahl von Ensembles, bestehend aus Klassifikatoren mit Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression und Random Forests. Wir nutzten Unigramm- und Bigrammfunktionen und versuchten, die Schiefe der Daten durch die Verwendung von Oversampling auszugleichen. Unsere Ergebnisse der Aufgabenbewertung belegen uns neunzehntes von 48-Systemen in der englischen Evaluation und fünftes von 21-Systemen in der spanischen Evaluation. Nach der Auswertung stellten wir fest, dass einige einfache Änderungen an unserer Vorverarbeitung unsere Ergebnisse deutlich verbessern könnten. Nachdem wir diese Änderungen vorgenommen hatten, erreichten wir Ergebnisse, die uns auf Platz sechs in der englischen Bewertung und auf Platz zwei in der spanischen platziert hätten.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustave Duluth UROP-a koji su sudjelovali u zadatku 2, višejezičkom Emoji predviđanju. Oslanjali smo se na razne ensemble sastavljene od klasifikatora koristeći Naive Bayes, Logističku regresiju i Random Forests. Koristili smo unigramne i velike karakteristike i pokušali premještati kost podataka kroz upotrebu nadproširenja. Naša procjena zadatka nas čini 19. od 48 sustava u engleskoj procjeni, a 5. od 21. na španjolskom. Nakon procjene shvatili smo da bi neke jednostavne promjene našeg predobrazovanja mogle značajno poboljšati naš rezultat. Nakon ove promjene, postigli smo rezultate koji bi nas postavili šesti u engleskoj procjeni, a drugo na španjolskom.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem UROP Duluth yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Kami bergantung pada berbagai ensemble yang terbuat dari klasifikasi menggunakan Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression, dan Random Forests. Kami menggunakan karakteristik unigram dan bigram dan mencoba untuk mengorbankan skewness data melalui menggunakan oversampling. Our task evaluation results place us 19th of 48 systems in the English evaluation, and 5th of 21 in the Spanish.  Setelah evaluasi kami menyadari bahwa beberapa perubahan sederhana pada preproses kami bisa meningkatkan hasil kami dengan signifikan. Setelah membuat perubahan ini kami mencapai hasil yang akan menempatkan kita ke-enam dalam evaluasi Inggris, dan kedua dalam bahasa Spanyol.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم\u200cهای UROP دولوت را توصیف می\u200cکند که در وظیفه ۲۰۱۸، پیشنهاد اموژی چندین زبان شرکت می\u200cکنند. ما بر مختلف انجمن\u200cهایی که از طریق مختلف\u200cکنندگان با استفاده از بیز\u200cهای نایو، انجمن منطقی و جنگل\u200cهای تصادفی بسته\u200cایم اعتماد کردیم. ما از ویژگی\u200cهای یونیگرام و بزرگ استفاده کردیم و سعی کردیم شکست داده\u200cها را از طریق استفاده از زیادی افزایش کند. نتیجه ارزیابی کار ما 19 از 48 سیستم را در ارزیابی انگلیسی قرار می دهد، و پنجمین از 21 در اسپانیایی قرار می دهد. بعد از ارزیابی متوجه شدیم که بعضی تغییرات ساده برای پیش\u200cپردازش ما می\u200cتوانند نتیجه\u200cهایمان را بسیار بهتر کنند. بعد از اینکه این تغییرات را انجام دادیم، نتایج رسیدیم که ما را ششمین در ارزیابی انگلیسی قرار داد، و دوم در اسپانیایی قرار داد.', 'ko': "본고는SemEval-18퀘스트2의'다국어 표정 예측'에 참여한 델루스 UROP시스템을 소개한다.우리는 소박한 베일러스, 논리 회귀, 무작위 숲의 분류기로 구성된 각종 집합에 의존한다.우리는 단도와 쌍도 특징을 사용했고 샘플링을 통해 데이터의 편향을 상쇄하려고 했다.우리의 임무 평가 결과 영어 평가 48개 시스템 중 19위, 스페인어 평가 21개 시스템 중 5위에 올랐다.평가 후, 우리는 예처리에 대해 간단한 변경을 하면 우리의 결과를 현저하게 개선할 수 있다는 것을 깨달았다.이런 변화 이후 우리는 영어 성적 6위, 스페인어 성적 2위를 차지했다.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval-2018 Taýýasy 2, Multilingual Emoji Taýýarlamagynda goşulýan Dulut UROP sistemlerini tashylaýar. Naive Bayes, Logistik Regresi we Taýdalyk Forenler ullanýan klasifikatçylara güýçlendik. Biz unigram ve kocaman özelliklerini kullandık ve verilerin boşluklarını aşırı büyütmeye çalıştık. Görevimiz çykyşymyz üçin biziň iňlisçe çykyşymyzda 19-nji sistemasy we 21-nji 5-nji sistemasy Spanish dilinde bolýar. Ýagtylmakdan soň, öňki işleýişimizde birnäçe basit üýtgewler netijelerimizi gowurap biler diýip pikir etdik. Bu üýtgeşikleri edenden soň bizi iňlisçe deňleşmede altyny we ikinji sany iňlisçe salyp bilerdik.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver de Duluth UROP systemer, der deltog i SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Vi stolede på en række ensembler bestående af klassikere, der bruger Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression og Random Forests. Vi brugte unigram og bigram funktioner og forsøgte at udligne skævheden af dataene gennem brug af oversampling. Vores opgavevalueringsresultater placerer os 19. ud af 48 systemer i den engelske evaluering og 5. ud af 21 på spansk. Efter evalueringen indså vi, at nogle enkle ændringer i vores forbehandling kunne forbedre vores resultater betydeligt. Efter at have foretaget disse ændringer opnåede vi resultater, der ville have placeret os sjette i den engelske evaluering og anden i den spanske.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa UROP wa Duluth ambao ulishiriki kazi ya SemEval-2018, Udhibiti wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji. Tulitegemea mabomu kadhaa yaliyotengenezwa na wataalamu kwa kutumia Naive Bayes, Regression of Logistic, and Random misitu. Tulitumia utambulisho wa kiunigram na mipango na tukajaribu kutoa ubunifu wa taarifa kupitia matumizi ya upanuaji. Our task evaluation results place us 19th of 48 systems in the English evaluation, and 5th of 21 in the Spanish.  Baada ya tathmini tuligundua kwamba baadhi ya mabadiliko rahisi ya michakato yetu ya kabla yanaweza kuboresha matokeo yetu. Baada ya kufanya mabadiliko haya tulifanikiwa matokeo ambayo ingetuweka sita katika utafiti wa Kiingereza, na pili katika lugha ya Kihispania.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSemEval-2018 ስራ 2፣ Multilingual Emoji ፕሮጀክት ተግባር የተጋጠሙትን Duluth UROP systems ይናገራል፡፡ በናይብ ባይስ፣ Logistic Regression እና ቀዳሚ ዱርቦች በተጠቃሚ በተለያዩ አዳራሾች ላይ ተጠጋን፡፡ የዩንግራም እና ቢግሪም ምርጫዎች ተጠቃሚ እና የዳራዎችን ስውር በመጠቀም ሞክረናል፡፡ የስራ ግንኙነታችን የ48 ድምፅ አሥረኛ የኢንግሊዘኛ ውጤት እና በስፓኒስዊው 21 አምስተኛ ነው፡፡ ከዚህም ማስታወቂያው በኋላ አንዳንድ ቀላል ለቀዳሚ ለውጦችን ፍሬዎቻችንን በኩል ያበዛል፡፡ ይህንን ለውጦች ካደረገ በኋላ በንግግሊዝኛ ማስረጃ ስድስተኛ እና በስፓኒስዊው ሁለተኛ ፍሬዎችን አግኝተናል፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die Duluth UROP stelsels wat gedeel het in SemEval-2018 taak 2, Multilingual Emoji voorskrif. Ons het op 'n verskillende ensemble gemaak van klassifiseerders gebruik van Naive Bayes, Logistiese Regresie en Random Voorste. Ons het unigram en bigram-funksies gebruik en probeer om die skeurigheid van die data deur die gebruik van oorsampling te offset. Ons taak-evaluasie laat ons 19de van 48 stelsels in die Engelse evaluasie plek en 5de van 21 in die Spaanse. Na die evaluasie het ons bevestig dat sommige eenvoudige veranderinge aan ons voorafverwerking betekenlik ons resultate kan verbeter. Na hierdie veranderinge gemaak het ons resultate ontvang wat ons sesde in die Engelse evaluasie geplaas het, en tweede in die Spaanse.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemet Duluth UROP që morën pjesë në SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Ne mbështeteshim në një shumëllojshmëri të ensembleve të përbërë nga klasifikuesit duke përdorur Naive Bayes, Regression Logjik dhe pyjet e rastësishme. Ne përdorëm karakteristika unigram dhe bigram dhe u përpoqëm të kompensojmë poshtërimin e të dhënave nëpërmjet përdorimit të mbishtypjes. Rezultatet tona të vlerësimit të detyrës na vënë në 19 nga 48 sistemet në vlerësimin anglez, dhe 5 nga 21 në spanjoll. Pas vlerësimit kuptuam se disa ndryshime të thjeshta në paraprocesimin tonë mund të përmirësojnë ndjeshëm rezultatet tona. Pas bërjes së këtyre ndryshimeve arritëm rezultate që do të na kishin vënë të gjashtën në vlerësimin anglez dhe të dytën në spanjoll.', 'az': "Bu kańüńĪt, SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction'a katńĪlan Duluth UROP sisteml…ôrini t…ôsdiq edir. Biz Naive Bayes, Logistical Regression v…ô Random Forests vasit…ôsil…ô klasifikatorlardan yaratdńĪńüńĪmńĪz m√ľxt…ôlif ensembli t…ôv…ôkk√ľl etdik. Biz unigram v…ô bigram √∂zellikl…ôrini istifad…ô etdik v…ô m…ôlumatlarńĪn d…ôyiŇüikliyini aŇüńĪrńĪ y√ľks…ôltm…ôk vasit…ôsil…ô d…ôyiŇüdirm…ôk ist…ôdik. Bizim iŇüimizin deńüerlendirm…ôsi biz…ô ńįngilizce deńüerlendirm…ôsind…ô 48 sisteml…ôrin 19-ini v…ô 21-in in 5-ini ńįspanyolca yaratdńĪ. V…ôziyy…ôtl…ôrd…ôn sonra baŇüa d√ľŇüd√ľk ki, …ôvv…ôlc…ô iŇül…ôm…ômizin b…ôzi basit d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôri sonu√ßlarńĪmńĪzńĪ √ßox yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪra bil…ôr. Bu d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôri yaratdńĪqdan sonra biz…ô ńįngilizce deńüerlendirm…ôsind…ô altńĪncńĪnńĪ v…ô ikincisini ńįspanyolca yerl…ôŇüdirdik.", 'ca': "Aquest article descriu els sistemes de Duluth UROP que van participar en SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. We relied on a variety of ensembles made up of classifiers using Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression, and Random Forests.  Vam utilitzar característiques unigrames i bigrams i vam intentar compensar l'escassetat de les dades amb l'ús de l'examplació. Els resultats de l'evaluació de les tasques ens posen el 19 de 48 sistemes a l'evaluació anglesa, i el 5 de 21 en espanyol. Després de l'evaluació ens vam adonar que alguns canvis senzills en el nostre pré-processament podrien millorar significativament els nostres resultats. Després de fer aquests canvis vam aconseguir resultats que ens haurien posat en sexta a l'evaluació anglesa, i en segon a l'espanyol.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি দুলুথ ইউরোপি সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করেছে যারা সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২, মাল্টিভাষায় ইমোজি ভাষায় অংশগ্রহণ করেছ আমরা নেভ বেইস, লোগিস্টিক নিয়ন্ত্রণ এবং র্যান্ডোমেল বন ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ব আমরা ইউনিগ্রাম এবং বিগ্রামের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করেছিলাম এবং বেশী ব্যবহারের মাধ্যমে তথ্যের স্ক্যানিস্ট করার চেষ্ আমাদের কাজের মুল্যায়নের ফলাফল আমাদের ইংরেজী মূল্যের ১৯ সিস্টেম এবং স্প্যানিশের ৫তম। এই মূল্যের পর আমরা বুঝতে পারলাম যে আমাদের পূর্ব প্রক্রিয়ার কিছু সাধারণ পরিবর্তন আমাদের ফলাফল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ করতে পার এই পরিবর্তনগুলো পরিবর্তন করার পর আমরা ফলাফল পেয়েছিলাম যা ইংরেজি মূল্যের ছয়টি ভাষায় আমাদের রেখেছিল এবং স্প্যানিশ ভা', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է Դուլյութ ԵՄՕՊ համակարգերը, որոնք մասնակցել են ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի 2-րդ հանձնարարության, Երկուլեզու Էմոջայի կանխատեսման մեջ: Մենք հիմնվեցինք բազմաթիվ համակարգերի վրա, որոնք կազմված են դասակարգերից, օգտագործելով Նայվ Բեյսը, Լոգիստիկ ռեգրեսիան և պատահական անտառները: Մենք օգտագործեցինք միագրամ և բիգրամ առանձնահատկություններ և փորձեցինք հաշվարկել տվյալների թերությունը չափազանց մեծացնելու միջոցով: Our task evaluation results place us 19th of 48 systems in the English evaluation, and 5th of 21 in the Spanish.  Ագնահատումից հետո մենք հասկացանք, որ մեր նախավերլուծության որոշ պարզ փոփոխությունները կարող են նշանակալի բարելավել մեր արդյունքները: After making these changes we attained results that would have placed us sixth in the English evaluation, and second in the Spanish.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse Duluth UROP süsteeme, mis osalesid SemEval-2018 ülesandes 2, mitmekeelne emoji prognoos. Me toetusime mitmesugustele klassifitseerijatest koosnevatele ansamblitele, mis kasutasid Naive Bayesi, Logistic Regression ja Random Forests. Kasutasime unigrammi ja bigrami funktsioone ning püüdsime tasakaalustada andmete vintsust liigse võimendamise abil. Meie ülesannete hindamise tulemused asetavad meid inglise keeles hindamisel 19. süsteemi ja hispaania keeles 21. süsteemi 5. süsteemi. Pärast hindamist mõistsime, et mõned lihtsad muudatused meie eeltöötluses võivad oluliselt parandada meie tulemusi. Pärast nende muudatuste tegemist jõudsime tulemusteni, mis oleksid asetanud meid kuuendaks inglise hindamisel ja teine hispaania keeles.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan Duluth UROP -järjestelmiä, jotka osallistuivat SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction -ohjelmaan. Luotimme erilaisiin kokoonpanoihin, jotka koostuivat luokittelijoista Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression ja Random Forests. Käytimme unigrammi- ja bigrame-ominaisuuksia ja yritimme kompensoida datan vääristymää käyttämällä ylivalotusta. Tehtäväarvioinnin tulokset sijoittuvat yhdeksänneksi 48 järjestelmästä englanninkielisessä arvioinnissa ja viidenneksi 21 järjestelmästä espanjassa. Arvioinnin jälkeen huomasimme, että muutamat yksinkertaiset muutokset esikäsittelyyn voisivat merkittävästi parantaa tuloksiamme. Näiden muutosten jälkeen saavutimme tuloksia, jotka olisivat asettaneet meidät kuudenneksi englanninkielisessä arvioinnissa ja toiseksi espanjassa.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje Duluth UROP systémy, které se podílely na SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Spoléhali jsme na celou řadu souborů složených z klasifikátorů používajících Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression a Random Less. Použili jsme unigramové a bigramové funkce a snažili jsme se kompenzovat šikmou hodnotu dat pomocí oversamplingu. Naše výsledky hodnocení úkolů nám umístí devatenáctý z 48 systémů v anglickém hodnocení a pátý z 21 ve španělštině. Po vyhodnocení jsme si uvědomili, že některé jednoduché změny v našem předzpracování by mohly výrazně zlepšit naše výsledky. Po provedení těchto změn jsme dosáhli výsledků, které by nás umístily šesté v anglickém hodnocení a druhé ve španělštině.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sisteme Duluth UROP-a koji su sudjelovali u zadatku 2. iz pola Evala-2018, višejezičku predstavu Emojija. Oslanjali smo se na razne ensemble sastavljene od klasifikatora koristeći Naive Bayes, Logističku regresiju i Random Forests. Koristili smo unigrame i velike karakteristike i pokušali da prebacimo skeniranje podataka kroz upotrebu nadproširenja. Naša procjena zadataka nas stavlja na 19. od 48 sistema u engleskoj procjeni, a 5. od 21 na španjolskom. Nakon procjene shvatili smo da bi nam neke jednostavne promjene mogle znatno poboljšati rezultate. Nakon što smo napravili te promjene, dobili smo rezultate koji bi nas stavili šesti u Englesku procjenu, a drugo na španjolski.', 'sk': 'V prispevku so opisani sistemi UROP Duluth, ki so sodelovali v nalogi 2 SemEval-2018, Večjezična napoved emojev. Zanašali smo se na različne ansambele, sestavljene iz klasifikatorjev, ki uporabljajo Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression in Random Forests. Uporabili smo unigramske in bigramske funkcije in poskušali izravnati skromnost podatkov z uporabo prekomernega vzorčenja. Naši rezultati ocenjevanja nalog nas uvrščajo na 19. od 48 sistemov v angleškem in 5. od 21 v španskem. Po oceni smo ugotovili, da lahko nekatere preproste spremembe naše predobdelave bistveno izboljšajo naše rezultate. Po teh spremembah smo dosegli rezultate, ki bi nas uvrstili na šesto mesto v angleški oceni in drugo v španščini.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכות דולות UROP שהשתתפו ב SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. הסמכנו על מגוון של אסמבלים עשויים מסווגים בשימוש בנייב בייס, רגרסיה לוגיסטית, ויערים אקראיים. השתמשנו במיוחדים של יוניגרם וביגרם וניסינו לפצות את התעללות של הנתונים באמצעות השימוש במדגים יתר. תוצאות הערכת המשימה שלנו מוציאים אותנו ב-19 מ-48 מערכות בהערכה האנגלית, ו-5 מ-21 בספרדית. לאחר הערכה הבנו שכמה שינויים פשוטים בתהליך הקדמי שלנו יכולים לשפר את התוצאות שלנו באופן משמעותי. לאחר שעשינו את השינויים האלה השגנו תוצאות שהיו מכניסים אותנו לשישית בהערכה האנגלית, ושנית בספרדית.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambaran kelas Duluh URL OP sistem sing nyengkuyung ing semebal-2013 task 2, Multilanguage emuji prediksiyon. Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh akeh akeh akeh akeh akeh di-akeh liyar neng sampeyan gawe kaya gratis Kernel Tarjamahan nggawe barang kawit karo 19 sampek 48no ning panjenenganipun dadi, lan 5 sampek sing katêpakan ning kastilla. Awak dhéwé éntukno ngerti resmi-resmi sing dikarepaké perusahaan kanggo ngilangno barang nggawe barang nggawe barang tanggal sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé nggawe éntuk éntuk iki, dadi iki bakal sedhaya kanggo awak dhéwé isih lan ujaran Inggris, lan segond kanggo Kasuluyan.', 'bo': 'This paper describes the Duluth UROP systems that participated in SemEval-2018 Task 2, Multilingual Emoji Prediction. ང་ཚོས་Naive Bayes,Logistic Regression,Random Forests་སྤྱོད་པའི་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཅན་གྱི་ཨིན་རྟགས་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བཞག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་ཆ་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱ་བ་དག་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ཕྱིར་འཐེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་འགན་ལྡན་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་འགོད་པ་དང་། སྐད་རིའི་ནང་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་འགོད་པ་༡༩ དཔྱད་ཞིག་གི་རྗེས་སུ། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ བཟོ་བཅོས་འདི་དག་གི་རྗེས་སུ་ང་ཚོར་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲས་འབོར་ཐུབ་པ་དེ་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་དཔྱད་འགན། འོན་ཀྱང་སྐར་', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana the insuluth UROP system that took part in the SemEV-2018 Taimar 2, multiziman Emoji Prediction. Mun dõgara a kan wasu misãlai da aka samu da Naive Bayes, Logistic Regression, da Rand Fatsunsa. We used unigram and bigram features and tried to offset the skewness of the data through the use of oversampling.  Kayan aikinmu na halatar da mu na 19 na'ura 48 cikin littafin Ingiriya, da 5 na'yan 21 cikin Isbanish. Bayan hakarin, muka gane cewa wasu musanyi masu sauri ne da ke gaba-aikininmu, za ta kange matsalanmu mai girma. Bayyan musanyoyin waɗannan, mun sami matsayin ta wajen ta zama na shida mu, a cikin muhalli na Ingiriya, da na sau a cikin Isbanza."}
{'en': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'ar': 'CENNLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: التمثيل الموزع المحسن للنص باستخدام الفئات المستهدفة لتمثيل توقع الرموز التعبيرية', 'es': 'CENNLP en la Tarea 2 de SemEval-2018: Representación distribuida mejorada de texto mediante clases objetivo para la representación de predicción de emoji', 'fr': "CENNLP au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Représentation distribuée améliorée du texte à l'aide de classes cibles pour la représentation de prédiction d'emoji", 'pt': 'CENNLP no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Representação Distribuída Aprimorada de Texto usando Classes de Destino para Representação de Previsão de Emoji', 'ja': 'SENNLP at SemEval -2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'zh': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 事 2:以类表情符号占分布式', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर CENNLP: इमोजी भविष्यवाणी प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए लक्ष्य कक्षाओं का उपयोग कर पाठ का संवर्धित वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व', 'ru': 'CENNLP на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Улучшенное распределенное представление текста с использованием целевых классов для представления прогноза эмодзи', 'ga': 'CENNLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Léiriú Dáilte Feabhsaithe ar Téacs ag baint úsáide as Sprioc-aicmí le haghaidh Léiriú Prediction Emoji', 'ka': 'CENNLP SemEval-2018 დავალება 2: უფრო მეტად გაფართლებული ტექსტის გამოყენება მისაღების კლასების გამოყენება ემოჯია წინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწ', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: Ενισχυμένη Κατανεμημένη Αντιπροσωπεία Κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας κατηγορίες στόχου για την Αντιπροσωπεία Προβολών', 'hu': 'CENNNLP a SemEval-2018 2. feladaton: A szöveg elosztott megjelenítése célosztályok segítségével Emoji-előrejelzés reprezentációjához', 'it': 'CENNNLP a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Migliorata la rappresentazione distribuita del testo utilizzando le classi target per la rappresentazione predittiva Emoji', 'kk': 'CENNLP 2. тапсырмасында 2. тапсырма: Эмози тапсырмасының мақсат классиясын қолдану үшін таратылған мәтіннің тапсырмасын көтеру', 'lt': 'CENNLP pusėje 2018 m. 2 užduotis: sustiprintas teksto pasiskirstymas naudojant tikslines klases, skirtas Emoji prognozės atstovavimui', 'mk': 'ЦЕНЛП на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Појачувана дистрибуирана претстава на текстот користејќи метни класи за претстава на емои предвидување', 'mt': 'CENNLP f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 2: Rappreżentanza Distribwita mtejba tat-Test bl-użu ta’ Klassijiet fil-Mira għar-Rappreżentanza tat-Tbassir Emoji', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2- ല്\u200d സെന്\u200dനെല്\u200dപി: എമോജി മുന്\u200dഗണന പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം ക്ലാസുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വിതരണം ചെയ്ത പദാവല', 'ms': 'CENNLP pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Perwakilan Terkembangkan Teks menggunakan Kelas Sasaran untuk Perwakilan Prediksi Emoji', 'mn': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'no': 'CENNLP ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 2: Forbetra distribuert representasjon av tekst ved hjelp av målklassar for representasjon av Emoji', 'pl': 'CENLLP na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Ulepszona rozproszona reprezentacja tekstu przy użyciu klas docelowych do reprezentacji prognoz Emoji', 'ro': 'CENNNLP la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Reprezentarea distribuită îmbunătățită a textului folosind clasele țintă pentru reprezentarea predicției emoji', 'sr': 'CENNLP na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text koristeći ciljne klase za predstavljanje Emoji', 'sv': 'CENNNLP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Förbättrad distribuerad representation av text med hjälp av målklasser för Emoji Prediction Representation', 'so': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using fasalka Target for Emoji Prediction', 'si': 'CENNLP at Halfeval-2018 Job 2: EnHanned Distribed represition of Text', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் CENNLP: எமோயி முன்னிருப்பு மாற்றுதலுக்கு செருகுப்பொருள் வகுப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி மேம்படுத்தி உரையின் பிரத', 'ur': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Trung tâm tham gia vào nhiệm vụ SemEvl-thẩm 8 2: Sự phát triển xinh đẹp của văn bản dùng lớp đích cho công ty Emoji prediction Representation', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Подобрено разпределено представяне на текст чрез целеви класове за представяне на емоджи прогнозиране', 'nl': 'CENLLP op SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Verbeterde gedistribueerde weergave van tekst met behulp van doelklassen voor emoji voorspelling representatie', 'hr': 'CENNLP na zadatku 2. ispitivanja: poboljšan raspodjeljen predstavljanje teksta koristeći ciljne klase predstavljanja Emojija', 'da': 'CENNNLP ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Forbedret distribueret repræsentation af tekst ved hjælp af målklasser til Emoji Forudsigelse Repræsentation', 'id': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'de': 'Aufgabe 2: Erweiterte verteilte Textdarstellung mittels Zielklassen für die Emoji-Vorhersage', 'ko': 'CENNLP가 SemEval-18 작업 2: 이모티콘 예측을 사용하여 표시하는 목표 클래스를 사용하여 텍스트의 분포식 표현을 강화합니다', 'fa': 'CENNLP در تابع ۲۰۱۸: توسط کلاس هدف برای نمایش پیشنهاد Emoji', 'tr': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'sw': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'af': 'CENNLP by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Verbeter verspreidige voorstelling van Teks gebruik doel klasse vir Emoji voorstelling voorstelling', 'sq': 'CENNLP në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'am': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Advanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'hy': 'CENLP-ը, 2018 թվականի կենտրոնում 2. առաջադրանքն է. տեքստի զարգացած տարածված ներկայացումը, օգտագործելով էմոյի կանխատեսման նպատակային դասեր', 'az': 'CENNLP at semiEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২-এ সিএনএলপি: ইমোজি প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য টার্গেট ক্লাস ব্যবহার করে টার্গেট ক্লাস ব্যবহার করে টেক্সট প্রতিনি', 'bs': 'CENNLP na zadatku 2. poluvremeno-2018: Povećana rasprostranjena predstavljanja teksta koristeći ciljne klase predstavljanja Emoji', 'ca': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation', 'et': 'CENLLP SemEval-2018 ülesanne 2: Teksti täiustatud jaotatud esindamine, kasutades sihtklasse emojiprognoosi esitamiseks', 'cs': 'Úkol 2: Rozšířená distribuovaná reprezentace textu pomocí cílových tříd pro reprezentaci předpovědi emoji', 'fi': 'CENLLP SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Teht채v채 2: Parannettu tekstin hajautettu esitt채minen k채ytt채m채ll채 kohdeluokkia emojiennusteessa', 'he': 'CENNLP ב SemEval-2018 משימה 2: מייצג מוסכם משפר של טקסט באמצעות שיעורי מטרה', 'jv': 'CeNNLP at semi-2008 task 2: ENhancemed Distributed representation of Text use TarGet Closes for emuji predikion representation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'CENLLP na SemEval-2018 naloga 2: Izboljšana distribucijska predstavitev besedila z uporabo ciljnih razredov za predstavitev emojijev predstavitve', 'bo': 'CENNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Enhanced Distributed Representation of Text using Target Classes for Emoji Prediction Representation'}
{'en': 'Emoji is one of the fastest growing language   in pop-culture, especially in social media and it is very unlikely for its usage to decrease. These are generally used to bring an extra level of meaning to the texts, posted on social media platforms. Providing such an added info, gives more insights to the plain text, arising to hidden interpretation within the text. This paper explains our analysis on Task 2,   Multilingual Emoji Prediction sharedtask conducted by Semeval-2018. In the task, a predicted emoji based on a piece of Twitter text are labelled under 20 different classes (most commonly used emojis) where these classes are learnt and further predicted are made for unseen Twitter text. In this work, we have experimented and analysed emojis predicted based on Twitter text, as a classification problem where the entailing emoji is considered as a label for every individual text data. We have implemented this using distributed representation of text through fastText. Also, we have made an effort to demonstrate how fastText framework can be useful in case of emoji prediction. This task is divide into two subtask, they are based on dataset presented in two different languages English and Spanish.', 'ar': 'تعد Emoji واحدة من "اللغات الأسرع نموًا" في الثقافة الشعبية ، خاصة في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ومن غير المرجح أن ينخفض استخدامها. تستخدم هذه بشكل عام لإضفاء مستوى إضافي من المعنى للنصوص ، المنشورة على منصات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. توفير مثل هذه المعلومات المضافة ، يعطي مزيدًا من الأفكار للنص العادي ، والتي تنشأ عن التفسير المخفي داخل النص. تشرح هذه الورقة تحليلنا للمهمة الثانية ، "توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات" التي أجراها Semeval-2018. في المهمة ، يتم تصنيف الرموز التعبيرية المتوقعة استنادًا إلى جزء من نص Twitter تحت 20 فئة مختلفة (الرموز التعبيرية الأكثر استخدامًا) حيث يتم تعلم هذه الفئات والتنبؤ بها بشكل أكبر لنص Twitter غير المرئي. في هذا العمل ، قمنا بتجربة وتحليل الرموز التعبيرية التي تم توقعها بناءً على نص Twitter ، كمشكلة تصنيف حيث يتم اعتبار الرموز التعبيرية المتضمنة تسمية لكل بيانات نصية فردية. لقد قمنا بتنفيذ هذا باستخدام التمثيل الموزع للنص من خلال fastText. أيضًا ، لقد بذلنا جهدًا لتوضيح مدى فائدة إطار عمل النص السريع في حالة التنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية. تنقسم هذه المهمة إلى مهمتين فرعيتين ، وهما تستندان إلى مجموعة بيانات مقدمة بلغتين مختلفتين الإنجليزية والإسبانية.', 'pt': 'Emoji é uma das “linguagens que mais crescem” na cultura pop, especialmente nas mídias sociais e é muito improvável que seu uso diminua. Estes geralmente são usados para trazer um nível extra de significado aos textos, postados nas plataformas de mídia social. Fornecer essa informação adicional fornece mais insights para o texto simples, surgindo a interpretação oculta dentro do texto. Este artigo explica nossa análise da Tarefa 2, tarefa compartilhada "Previsão de emojis multilíngues", realizada pela Semeval-2018. Na tarefa, um emoji previsto com base em um pedaço de texto do Twitter é rotulado em 20 classes diferentes (emojis mais comumente usados), onde essas classes são aprendidas e ainda previstas são feitas para texto invisível do Twitter. Neste trabalho, experimentamos e analisamos emojis previstos com base no texto do Twitter, como um problema de classificação em que o emoji que o envolve é considerado um rótulo para todos os dados de texto individuais. Implementamos isso usando representação distribuída de texto por meio de fastText. Além disso, fizemos um esforço para demonstrar como o framework fastText pode ser útil no caso de previsão de emoji. Esta tarefa é dividida em duas subtarefas, elas são baseadas em um conjunto de dados apresentado em dois idiomas diferentes, inglês e espanhol.', 'es': 'El emoji es uno de los «idiomas de más rápido crecimiento» en la cultura pop, especialmente en las redes sociales, y es muy poco probable que su uso disminuya. Por lo general, se utilizan para dar un nivel extra de significado a los textos publicados en las plataformas de redes sociales. Proporcionar esa información adicional proporciona más información sobre el texto sin formato, lo que da lugar a una interpretación oculta dentro del texto. Este documento explica nuestro análisis de la tarea 2, «Predicción multilingüe de emojis», tarea compartida realizada por Semeval-2018. En la tarea, un emoji predicho basado en un fragmento de texto de Twitter se etiqueta en 20 clases diferentes (los emojis más utilizados) donde estas clases se aprenden y se predicen más para el texto de Twitter no visto. En este trabajo, hemos experimentado y analizado los emojis predichos basados en el texto de Twitter, como un problema de clasificación en el que el emoji correspondiente se considera una etiqueta para cada dato de texto individual. Lo hemos implementado mediante la representación distribuida de texto a través de FastText. Además, nos hemos esforzado por demostrar cómo el marco FastText puede ser útil en el caso de la predicción de emojis. Esta tarea se divide en dos subtareas, que se basan en un conjunto de datos presentado en dos idiomas diferentes, inglés y español.', 'fr': "L'emoji est l'un des «\xa0langages qui connaît la croissance la plus rapide\xa0» dans la culture pop, en particulier dans les médias sociaux, et il est très peu probable que son utilisation diminue. Ils sont généralement utilisés pour apporter un niveau de sens supplémentaire aux textes publiés sur les plateformes de réseaux sociaux. Fournir de telles informations supplémentaires donne plus d'informations au texte brut, résultant d'une interprétation cachée dans le texte. Cet article explique notre analyse de la tâche 2, «\xa0Prédiction multilingue des emoji\xa0», tâche partagée menée par Semeval-2018. Dans cette tâche, un emoji prédit basé sur un bout de texte Twitter est étiqueté dans 20 classes différentes (emojis les plus couramment utilisés) où ces classes sont apprises et les autres prédictions sont créées pour le texte Twitter non vu. Dans ce travail, nous avons expérimenté et analysé les emojis prédits sur la base du texte Twitter, comme un problème de classification où l'émoji impliqué est considéré comme une étiquette pour chaque donnée textuelle individuelle. Nous avons implémenté cela en utilisant la représentation distribuée du texte via FastText. En outre, nous avons fait un effort pour démontrer comment le framework FastText peut être utile en cas de prédiction d'emoji. Cette tâche est divisée en deux sous-tâches, elles sont basées sur un ensemble de données présenté en deux langues différentes, l'anglais et l'espagnol.", 'ja': '絵文字は、ポップカルチャー、特にソーシャルメディアにおいて「最も急速に成長している言語」の1つであり、その使用が減少する可能性は非常に低いです。 これらは通常、ソーシャルメディアプラットフォームに投稿されたテキストに追加のレベルの意味をもたらすために使用されます。 このような追加情報を提供することで、テキスト内の隠された解釈に起因するプレーンテキストにより多くの洞察を与えることができます。 本稿では、Semeval -2018が実施したタスク2「多言語絵文字予測」シェアタスクに関する分析について説明する。 このタスクでは、Twitterテキストの一部に基づいて予測された絵文字が20の異なるクラス（最も一般的に使用される絵文字）の下にラベル付けされ、これらのクラスが学習され、さらに予測された絵文字が見えないTwitterテキストのために作成される。 本研究では、個々のテキストデータのラベルとして絵文字を伴う分類上の問題として、Twitterのテキストに基づいて予測される絵文字を実験・解析してきた。 これは、fastTextを介したテキストの分散表現を使用して実装されています。 また、絵文字予測の場合に、どれだけ高速なテキストフレームワークが役立つかを実証する努力をしてきました。 このタスクは、英語とスペイン語の2つの異なる言語で提示されたデータセットに基づいて、2つのサブタスクに分割されます。', 'zh': '表情符号者,文之"长疾言"之一,特在社交媒体中,其用不太可能减。 此常所以社交媒体台文本额外之义也。 供此附加信息,为纯文本更多见解,以生于文本之隐解。 本文解Semeval-2018务2多言表情符号占。 其在任也,Twitter本之占表情符号表为20异类(常用之表情符号),学之于此,为不见之Twitter。 于是试析Twitter本之表情符号,以为分类,隐表情符号为数。 吾既因 fastText 而分布式之矣。 努力展Text框架表情符号占何益。 分为二务,盖以两言(英语西班牙语)呈数集云。', 'hi': 'इमोजी पॉप-संस्कृति में "सबसे तेजी से बढ़ती भाषा" में से एक है, विशेष रूप से सोशल मीडिया में और इसके उपयोग में कमी आने की संभावना बहुत कम है। ये आम तौर पर सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफार्मों पर पोस्ट किए गए ग्रंथों के लिए अर्थ का एक अतिरिक्त स्तर लाने के लिए उपयोग किए जाते हैं। इस तरह की एक अतिरिक्त जानकारी प्रदान करना, सादे पाठ को अधिक अंतर्दृष्टि देता है, जो पाठ के भीतर छिपी हुई व्याख्या के लिए उत्पन्न होता है। यह पेपर टास्क 2 पर हमारे विश्लेषण की व्याख्या करता है, "बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी" सेमेवल -2018 द्वारा आयोजित साझा किए गए कार्यों को साझा किया जाता है। कार्य में, ट्विटर पाठ के एक टुकड़े पर आधारित एक अनुमानित इमोजी को 20 अलग-अलग वर्गों (सबसे अधिक उपयोग किए जाने वाले इमोजी) के तहत लेबल किया जाता है जहां इन कक्षाओं को सीखा जाता है और आगे की भविष्यवाणी अनदेखी ट्विटर पाठ के लिए की जाती है। इस काम में, हमने ट्विटर टेक्स्ट के आधार पर भविष्यवाणी किए गए इमोजी का प्रयोग और विश्लेषण किया है, एक वर्गीकरण समस्या के रूप में जहां इमोजी को हर व्यक्तिगत टेक्स्ट डेटा के लिए लेबल के रूप में माना जाता है। हमने fastText के माध्यम से पाठ के वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करके इसे लागू किया है। इसके अलावा, हमने यह प्रदर्शित करने का प्रयास किया है कि इमोजी भविष्यवाणी के मामले में टेक्स्ट फ्रेमवर्क कितना तेज़ हो सकता है। इस कार्य को दो उप-कार्य में विभाजित किया गया है, वे दो अलग-अलग भाषाओं अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश में प्रस्तुत डेटासेट पर आधारित हैं।', 'ru': 'Emoji является одним из «самых быстрорастущих языков » в поп-культуре, особенно в социальных сетях, и его использование вряд ли уменьшится. Они, как правило, используются для привнесения дополнительного уровня смысла в тексты, размещенные на социальных медиа-платформах. Предоставление такой дополнительной информации дает больше понимания простого текста, возникающего из-за скрытого толкования в тексте. В этой статье объясняется наш анализ задачи 2 « Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи», выполненный Semeval-2018. В задании предсказанные эмодзи, основанные на фрагменте текста в Twitter, помечены как 20 различных классов (наиболее часто используемые эмодзи), где эти классы изучаются, а дальнейшие предсказания делаются для невидимого текста в Twitter. В этой работе мы экспериментировали и анализировали эмодзи, предсказанные на основе текста Twitter, как классификационную проблему, когда влекущее за собой эмодзи рассматривается как ярлык для каждой отдельной текстовой информации. Мы реализовали это с помощью распределенного представления текста через fastText. Также мы попытались продемонстрировать, насколько фреймворк fastText может быть полезен в случае предсказания эмодзи. Эта задача разделена на две подзадачи, они основаны на наборе данных, представленном на двух разных языках - английском и испанском.', 'ga': 'Tá Emoji ar cheann de na “teanga is mó fáis” sa popchultúr, go háirithe sna meáin shóisialta agus ní dócha go dtiocfaidh laghdú ar a húsáid. Úsáidtear iad seo go ginearálta chun leibhéal breise brí a thabhairt do na téacsanna, a phostáiltear ar ardáin na meán sóisialta. Trí fhaisnéis bhreise den sórt sin a sholáthar, tugtar níos mó léargais ar an ngnáth-théacs, ag éirí as léirmhíniú folaithe laistigh den téacs. Míníonn an páipéar seo ár n-anailís ar Thasc 2, “ Multilingual Emoji Prediction” tasc comhroinnte arna dhéanamh ag Semeval-2018. Sa tasc, déantar emoji tuartha bunaithe ar phíosa téacs Twitter a lipéadú faoi 20 rang éagsúil (na emojis is coitianta a úsáidtear) ina ndéantar na ranganna seo a fhoghlaim agus a thuar a thuilleadh do théacs Twitter nach bhfacthas riamh cheana. San obair seo, tá turgnamh agus anailís déanta againn ar emojis tuartha bunaithe ar théacs Twitter, mar fhadhb aicmithe ina meastar an emoji a bhaineann leis mar lipéad do gach sonraí téacs aonair. Tá sé seo curtha i bhfeidhm againn trí úsáid a bhaint as léiriú dáilte téacs trí fastText. Chomh maith leis sin, rinneamar iarracht a léiriú conas is féidir le creat tapaText a bheith úsáideach i gcás tuar emoji. Tá an tasc seo roinnte ina dhá fhothasc, tá siad bunaithe ar thacar sonraí a chuirtear i láthair in dhá theanga dhifriúla Béarla agus Spáinnis.', 'hu': 'Az emoji az egyik "leggyorsabban növekvő nyelv" a popkultúrában, különösen a közösségi médiában, és nagyon valószínűtlen, hogy használata csökken. Ezeket általában arra használják, hogy extra szintű jelentést adjanak a közösségi média platformokon közzétett szövegeknek. Egy ilyen kiegészítő információ megadása több betekintést nyújt az egyszerű szövegbe, ami rejtett értelmezést eredményez a szövegen belül. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a Semeval-2018 által végzett "Multilingual Emoji Prediction" feladat 2. feladat elemzését. A feladat során egy Twitter szövegrészén alapuló előrejelzett emojit 20 különböző osztályba (leggyakrabban használt emojik) jelölnek meg, ahol ezeket az osztályokat megtanulják és tovább jósolják a láthatatlan Twitter szövegekhez. Ebben a munkában kísérleteztünk és elemeztük a Twitter szöveg alapján előrejelzett emojikat, mint osztályozási problémát, ahol a vonatkozó emojikat minden egyes szövegadat címkéjének tekintik. Ezt a szöveg elosztott ábrázolásával valósítottuk meg a fastText segítségével. Emellett arra is törekedtünk, hogy bemutassuk, hogy a fastText keretrendszer milyen hasznos lehet emoji előrejelzés esetén. Ez a feladat két részfeladatra oszlik, amelyek két különböző nyelven angol és spanyol nyelven bemutatott adatkészleten alapulnak.', 'el': 'Είναι μια από τις ταχύτερα αναπτυσσόμενες γλώσσες στην ποπ-κουλτούρα, ειδικά στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης και είναι πολύ απίθανο η χρήση της να μειωθεί. Αυτά χρησιμοποιούνται γενικά για να φέρουν ένα επιπλέον επίπεδο νοήματος στα κείμενα που δημοσιεύονται στις πλατφόρμες κοινωνικών μέσων. Η παροχή τέτοιων προστιθέμενων πληροφοριών, δίνει περισσότερες πληροφορίες στο απλό κείμενο, προκαλώντας κρυφή ερμηνεία μέσα στο κείμενο. Η παρούσα εργασία εξηγεί την ανάλυσή μας για την εργασία 2, "Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη εμότζι" κοινή εργασία που διεξήχθη από το Semeval-2018. Στην εργασία, ένα προβλεπόμενο emoji βασισμένο σε ένα κομμάτι κειμένου του Twitter επισημαίνεται κάτω από 20 διαφορετικές τάξεις (συνήθως χρησιμοποιούμενα emoji) όπου αυτές οι τάξεις μαθαίνονται και περαιτέρω προβλέπονται γίνονται για αόρατο κείμενο του Twitter. Σε αυτή την εργασία, έχουμε πειραματιστεί και αναλύσει τα εμότζι που προβλέπονται με βάση το κείμενο του ως πρόβλημα ταξινόμησης όπου το εμότζι που συνεπάγεται θεωρείται ως ετικέτα για κάθε μεμονωμένο κείμενο δεδομένων. Αυτό το υλοποιήσαμε χρησιμοποιώντας κατανεμημένη αναπαράσταση του κειμένου μέσω του FastText. Επίσης, έχουμε κάνει μια προσπάθεια να δείξουμε πώς το πλαίσιο μπορεί να είναι χρήσιμο σε περίπτωση πρόβλεψης emoji. Αυτή η εργασία χωρίζεται σε δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες, βασίζονται σε σύνολο δεδομένων που παρουσιάζονται σε δύο διαφορετικές γλώσσες Αγγλικά και Ισπανικά.', 'it': "Emoji è uno dei 'linguaggi in più rapida crescita' nella cultura pop, soprattutto nei social media ed è molto improbabile che il suo utilizzo diminuisca. Questi sono generalmente utilizzati per dare un ulteriore livello di significato ai testi, pubblicati sulle piattaforme di social media. Fornire tali informazioni aggiuntive, dà più intuizioni al testo semplice, derivanti da interpretazioni nascoste all'interno del testo. Questo articolo spiega la nostra analisi sul Task 2, 'Multilingual Emoji Prediction' shared task condotto da Semeval-2018. Nel compito, un emoji previsto basato su un pezzo di testo di Twitter è etichettato in 20 classi diverse (emoji più comunemente usati) in cui queste classi vengono apprese e ulteriormente previste sono fatte per testo Twitter invisibile. In questo lavoro, abbiamo sperimentato e analizzato emoji predetti basati sul testo di Twitter, come problema di classificazione in cui le emoji implicanti sono considerate come un'etichetta per ogni singolo dato di testo. Abbiamo implementato questo utilizzando la rappresentazione distribuita del testo tramite fastText. Inoltre, abbiamo fatto uno sforzo per dimostrare come il framework fastText può essere utile in caso di previsione emoji. Questo compito è diviso in due sottoattività, basate su set di dati presentati in due lingue diverse inglese e spagnolo.", 'lt': 'Emoji yra viena iš sparčiausiai augančių pop kultūros kalbų, ypač social in ėje žiniasklaidoje, ir labai mažai tikėtina, kad jos naudojimas sumažės. Jos paprastai naudojamos papildomai reikšmingiems tekstams, kurie skelbiami socialinės žiniasklaidos platformose. Tokios papildomos informacijos teikimas suteikia daugiau informacijos apie paprastąjį tekstą, atsirandantį dėl paslėpto teksto aiškinimo. Šiame dokumente paaiškinama mūsų analizė dėl 2 uždavinio „Daugiakalbės Emoji prognozės“ dalijamojo uždavinio, atlikto 2018 m. pusmečio mėn. In the task, a predicted emoji based on a piece of Twitter text are labelled under 20 different classes (most commonly used emojis) where these classes are learnt and further predicted are made for unseen Twitter text.  Šiame darbe eksperimentavome ir analizavome emodžius, numatytus remiantis Twitter tekstu, kaip klasifikavimo problem ą, kai susiję emodžiai laikomi kiekvieno atskiro teksto duomenų etikete. Mes tai įgyvendinome naudojant paskirstytą teksto pateikimą per fastText. Be to, mes dėjome pastangas parodyti, kaip greita teksto sistema gali būti naudinga emoji prognozės atveju. Ši užduotis padalijama į du paklausimus, jie grindžiami duomenų rinkiniu, pateiktu dviem skirtingomis anglų ir ispanų kalbomis.', 'mk': 'Емоџи е еден од „најбрзо растечките јазици“ во поп-културата, особено во социјалните медиуми и многу е неверојатно неговата употреба да се намали. Овие се генерално користат за да донесат дополнително ниво на значење на текстовите, објавени на платформите на социјалните медиуми. Providing such an added info, gives more insights to the plain text, arising to hidden interpretation within the text.  Овој документ ја објаснува нашата анализа за задачата 2, заедничката задача на „Мултијазичната предвидба на Емоја“, спроведена од Семевал-2018 година. Во задачата, предвидени емоџи базирани на дел од текстот на Твитер се означени под 20 различни класи (најчесто користени емоџи) каде што овие класи се научени и понатаму се предвидени за невидлив текст на Твитер. Во оваа работа, експериментиравме и анализиравме емоџии предвидени врз основа на Твитер текст, како проблем со класификацијата каде што меѓусебните емоџии се сметаат за етикета за секој индивидуален текст податок. Го спроведовме ова користејќи дистрибуирано претставување на текстот преку брз текст. Исто така, се обидовме да демонстрираме колку брза текстова рамка може да биде корисна во случај на предвидување на емоџи. Оваа задача е поделена на два потпрашања, тие се базирани на податоци претставени на два различни јазици англиски и шпански.', 'ka': "Emoji არის პოო-კულტურაში 'უფრო ბრძნობელი წარმოიქმნა' ენის ერთი, განსაკუთრებით სოციალური მედიაში და ის ძალიან არ შესაძლებელია მისი გამოყენება შემცირებად. ეს საერთოდ გამოყენებულია სოციალური მედია პლატატურებში, რომლებიც ტექსტის შესახებ უფრო მეტრი სანიშნო დონე. ასეთი დამატებული ინფორმაციის შესაძლებლობა, უფრო მეტი ინფორმაცია ტექსტის დამატებულია, რომელიც ტექსტის შორის დამატებულია. ეს წიგნი განახსნა ჩვენი ანალიზაცია 2-ზე, მრავალენგური Emoji წიგნის წიგნის წიგნის წიგნი, რომელიც მეორექალური-2018 წიგნით. ამ დავალებში, გადაწყვეტილი ემოჯია Twitter-ის ტექსტის ნაწილი 20 განსხვავებული კლასების ნაწილის ნაწილია (ყველაზე გამოყენებული ემოჯია) სადაც ეს კლასები ვისწავლია და დამატებული გადაწყვეტილება Twitter-ის ტექსტი ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებული და ანალიზიცირებული ემოიზები გადავიწყებულია Twitter ტექსტიდან, როგორც კლასიფიკაციის პრობლემა, სადაც ყველა ინდიველური ტექსტის მონა ჩვენ ამის გამოყენებული ტექსტის გაყოფილი რესპეცენტაციის გამოყენებით FastText. ამიტომ, ჩვენ ვაკეთებეთ ძალიან გამოცდილობა, როგორ სწრაფად ტექსტის ფრამეტრი შეიძლება იყოს გამოსაყენებელი ემოჯიას წინასწორებაში. ეს პარამეტრი იყოს ორი საკითხვაში გაყოფილი, ისინი დაბაზიან ორი განსხვავებული ენებით ანგლისური და სპანელი ენებით.", 'ms': "Emoji adalah salah satu 'bahasa yang tumbuh paling cepat' dalam budaya pop, terutama dalam media sosial dan ia sangat tidak mungkin untuk penggunaannya menurun. Ini biasanya digunakan untuk membawa tahap tambahan makna kepada teks, ditempatkan pada platform media sosial. Menyediakan maklumat tambahan seperti ini, memberikan lebih banyak pandangan kepada teks biasa, muncul kepada interpretasi tersembunyi dalam teks. Kertas ini menjelaskan analisis kami pada Tugas 2, ' Multilingual Emoji Prediction' shared task dilakukan oleh Semeval-2018. Dalam tugas ini, emoji dijangka berdasarkan teks Twitter ditabel di bawah 20 kelas yang berbeza (emoji yang paling biasa digunakan) di mana kelas ini telah belajar dan dijangka lebih lanjut dibuat untuk teks Twitter yang tidak terlihat. Dalam kerja ini, kami telah eksperimen dan menganalisis emoji dijangka berdasarkan teks Twitter, sebagai masalah klasifikasi di mana emoji yang mengandungi dianggap sebagai label bagi setiap data teks individu. Kami telah melaksanakan ini menggunakan perwakilan terhapus teks melalui FasText. Also, we have made an effort to demonstrate how fastText framework can be useful in case of emoji prediction.  This task is divide into two subtask, they are based on dataset presented in two different languages English and Spanish.", 'ml': "പോപ്പ് സംസ്കാരത്തില്\u200d 'ഏറ്റവും വേഗത്തില്\u200d വളര്\u200dന്ന ഭാഷ' എന്ന എമോയി ഒരാളാണ്. പ്രത്യേകിച്ചും സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d അതിന്റെ ഉപ ഇതൊക്കെ സാമാധാരണയായി സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകളില്\u200d പോസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്ത വാക്കുകളിലേക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d അര്\u200dത്ഥ ഇത്തരം കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊടുക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d വെളുത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d നല്\u200d This paper explains our analysis on Task 2, ' Multilingual Emoji Prediction' sharedtask conducted by Semeval-2018.  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഇമോജിയെ 20 വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്ലാസുകള്\u200dക്ക് കീഴില്\u200d എഴുതിയിരിക്കുന ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇമോജിനെ പരീക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടുണ്ട്, വിശ്വസിച്ചിട്ടുണ്ട്, ട്രൂട്ടറിലെ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് പ്രവചിച്ച വേഗത്തിലുള്ള പദാവലിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഇത് നാം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചിട്ടുണ്ട്. ഇമോജി പ്രവചനങ്ങളുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d എത്ര വേഗത്തിലാണെന്ന് വ്യക്തമാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോലി രണ്ടു സബ്ജോസ്സിലേക്ക് വിഭാഗിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളിലും സ്പാനിഷിലും വ്യക്തമായി ക", 'mn': 'Эмози бол поп соёлын хамгийн хурдан өсөх хэл, ялангуяа нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээ багасгах боломжгүй. Эдгээр нь ерөнхийдөө нийгмийн медиа платформууд дээр нэмэлт хэмжээний түвшинд авч ирдэг. Эдгээр нэмэгдсэн мэдээллийг хангах нь энгийн текст илүү олон ойлголт өгдөг. Текст дотор нуугдмал утгыг илүү ойлголт өгдөг. Энэ цаас бидний 2-р даалгаварын талаарх шинжилгээг тайлбарлаж байна. 2018 оны дугаар зууны үеийн "Олон хэл Эможи тайлбар" хэлний хуваалцааг. Энэ ажил дээр Твиттерийн текст дээр суурилсан эможи 20 өөр хичээл доор (ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг эможи) нэрлэгддэг. Эдгээр хичээлийг суралцаж, түүний хэлбэрээс илүү таамаглагдаггүй Твиттерийн текст дээр хийгддэг. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид Твиттерийн текст дээр үндсэн эможийг туршиж, шинжилгээ хийсэн бөгөөд хэн нэгэн текст өгөгдлийн тэмдэглэл гэж үздэг эможийг хуваалцах асуудал болно. Бид үүнийг FastText-ээр хуваарилсан хэлбэрийг ашиглан хийсэн. Мөн бид эможийн таамаглах үед хэрхэн хурдан Текст хэмжээсүүд хэрхэн ашигтай болохыг харуулахын тулд хичээл хийсэн. Энэ үйл ажиллагаа хоёр доогуур асуулт хувааж, тэд Англи, Испан хэлний хоёр өөр хэл дээр өгөгдлийн санд суурилсан.', 'mt': 'Emoji hija waħda mill-\'lingwi li qed jikbru bl-aktar ħeffa\' fil-popkultura, speċjalment fil-midja soċjali u x\'aktarx li l-użu tagħha ma jonqosx. These are generally used to bring an extra level of meaning to the texts, posted on social media platforms.  Providing such an added info, gives more insights to the plain text, arising to hidden interpretation within the text.  Dan id-dokument jispjega l-analiżi tagħna dwar il-Kompitu 2, kompitu kondiviż tal-"Predizzjoni Multilingwi ta\' Emoji" imwettaq mis-Semeval-2018. Fil-kompitu, emoji mbassra bbażati fuq biċċa test ta’ Twitter huma ttikkettati taħt 20 klassi differenti (emoji użati l-aktar b’mod komuni) fejn dawn il-klassijiet jitgħallmu u mbassra aktar għal test ta’ Twitter li ma jidhirx. F’dan ix-xogħol, esperimentawna u analizzaw emoji mbassra bbażati fuq it-test ta’ Twitter, bħala problem a ta’ klassifikazzjoni fejn l-emoji involuti jitqiesu bħala tikketta għal kull dejta tat-test individwali. Inimplimentajna dan billi ntużaw rappreżentazzjoni distribwita tat-test permezz ta’ FastText. Also, we have made an effort to demonstrate how fastText framework can be useful in case of emoji prediction.  Dan il-kompitu huwa maqsum f’żewġ sottomistoqsijiet, huma bbażati fuq sett ta’ dejta ppreżentat f’żewġ lingwi differenti bl-Ingliż u bl-Ispanjol.', 'kk': 'Эмози - pop- мәдениетінің "ең жылдам өсіру тілдерінің" бірі, әсіресе социалдық медиақтарда, және оның қолдануын азайту мүмкін емес. Олар әдетте социалдық медиа платформасында жіберілген мәтіндерге қосымша маңызды деңгейін қолданылады. Бұл қосылған мәлімет берілсе, мәтіннің ішінде жасырын түсініктемесін кәдімгі мәтінне көбірек түсініктер береді. Бұл қағаз біздің 2- тапсырманың анализациясын түсіндіреді, \'Көп тілдік эмози предикациясы\' бөлімін 2018- жылдың жарым-әрқашанда жасалған. Тапсырмасында, Твиттердің мәтініне негіздеген мәтінді 20 түрлі класс астында (көпшілік қолданылатын эмоджтердің көпшілігі) жазылады. Бұл класс оқылған және таңдалмаған Твиттердің мәтіні көрсе Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз Твиттердің мәтініне негізделген эмогияларды тәжірибе және анализ етіп тұрдық. Мәселелерді бөлек мәтін деректерінің белгілері ретінде қарастырылады. Біз бұл мәтіннің үлестірілген мәтінді FastText арқылы орындалдық. Мұндай-ақ, біз көзгерту үшін мәліметтердің бағдарламасының қанша жылдамдығын көрсету үшін әрекеттерді көзгертдік. Бұл тапсырма екі ішкі сұраныста бөліп, олар ағылшын және испан тілдерінде көрсетілген деректер жиынына негізделген.', 'pl': 'Emoji jest jednym z najszybciej rozwijających się języków w popkulturze, zwłaszcza w mediach społecznościowych i jest bardzo mało prawdopodobne, aby jego użycie spadło. Są one zazwyczaj wykorzystywane do nadania dodatkowego poziomu znaczenia tekstom publikowanym na platformach mediów społecznościowych. Podanie takich dodanych informacji daje więcej wglądów do zwykłego tekstu, wynikającego z ukrytej interpretacji w tekście. Niniejszy artykuł wyjaśnia naszą analizę dotyczącą wspólnego zadania "Wielojęzyczne prognozowanie Emoji" przeprowadzonego przez Semeval-2018. W zadaniu, przewidywane emoji oparte na fragmencie tekstu Twittera są oznaczone pod 20 różnymi klasami (najczęściej używane emoji), gdzie te klasy są uczone i dalej przewidywane są dla niewidzialnego tekstu Twittera. W niniejszej pracy eksperymentowaliśmy i analizowaliśmy emoji przewidywane na podstawie tekstu Twittera, jako problem klasyfikacji, w którym pociągające za sobą emoji jest traktowane jako etykieta dla każdego poszczególnego tekstu. Zaimplementowaliśmy to przy użyciu rozproszonej reprezentacji tekstu poprzez fastText. Dołożyliśmy również starań, aby pokazać, jak framework fastText może być przydatny w przypadku prognozowania emoji. Zadanie to jest podzielone na dwa podzadania, oparte na zbiorach danych prezentowanych w dwóch różnych językach angielskim i hiszpańskim.', 'ro': 'Emoji este unul dintre "limbile cu cea mai rapidă creștere" în cultura pop, în special în rețelele sociale și este foarte puțin probabil ca utilizarea sa să scadă. Acestea sunt folosite în general pentru a aduce un nivel suplimentar de semnificație textelor postate pe platformele de social media. Furnizarea unei astfel de informații adăugate, oferă mai multe perspective textului simplu, rezultând la interpretarea ascunsă în text. Această lucrare explică analiza noastră cu privire la Sarcina 2, "Predicția emoji multilingvă" desfășurată de Semeval-2018. În cadrul sarcinii, un emoji anticipat bazat pe o bucată de text Twitter este etichetat în 20 de clase diferite (cele mai frecvent utilizate emoji) unde aceste clase sunt învățate și prezise în continuare sunt făcute pentru text Twitter nevăzut. În această lucrare, am experimentat și analizat emojiurile prezise pe baza textului Twitter, ca o problemă de clasificare în care emojiurile implicate sunt considerate ca o etichetă pentru fiecare dată text individual. Am implementat acest lucru folosind reprezentarea distribuită a textului prin fastText. De asemenea, am făcut un efort pentru a demonstra modul în care cadrul fastText poate fi util în cazul predicției emoji. Această sarcină este împărțită în două subactivități, acestea se bazează pe setul de date prezentat în două limbi diferite engleză și spaniolă.', 'so': "Emoji waa mid ka mid ah luqada dhaqanka dadweynaha ee ugu dhaqsaha koritaanka, khusuusan isticmaalkeeda bulshada ee suurtagal u ah in ay hoosayso. Inta badan waxaa loo isticmaalaa inay warqadaha u keenaan heer dheer oo macluumaad ah, oo lagu soo bandhigaa majaajilooyinka shabakadda bulshada. Markaad siiso macluumaad faa’iido ah oo ku dareysan, waxaad ka heleysaa macluumaad dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan macluumaadka saxda ah, kaasoo ku saabsan turjumaadda qarsoon ee ku jira qoraalka gudaheeda. This paper explains our analysis on Task 2, ' Multilingual Emoji Prediction' sharedtask conducted by Semeval-2018.  Shaqada waxaa lagu magacaabaa emoji oo ku saleysan qeyb ka mid ah qoraalka Twitterka ah (inta badan isticmaalaya emojis) oo laga barto fasaladaas oo la sii sheegayo qoraalka Twitter ee qarsoon. Shaqadan ayaan imtixaannay oo baaritaannay emojis oo ku qoran taariikhda Twitterka, sida dhibaato fasax ah oo ay emoji ku saabsan tahay sida calaamad u eg macluumaad kasta oo qoraal ah. Waxan ayaannu ku soo dejinnay isticmaalka qeyb-dhigista qoraalka ee ku saabsan Text fasten. Sidoo kale waxaan isku daynay inaan caddeyno sida ay u faa’iido u yeelan karto qoraalka dhaadheer, haddii uu soo hor jeedo emoji. Shaqadan waxaa loo qeybiyaa laba shabakad, waxaa lagu saleysan macluumaadka lagu soo qoray laba luuqadood oo kala duduwan Ingiriis iyo Isbanish.", 'sv': 'Emoji är ett av de snabbast växande språken i popkulturen, särskilt i sociala medier och det är mycket osannolikt att dess användning minskar. Dessa används i allmänhet för att ge texterna en extra nivå av mening, som publiceras på sociala medier plattformar. Att tillhandahålla en sådan extra information ger mer insikter i den enkla texten, som uppstår till dold tolkning i texten. Denna uppsats förklarar vår analys av uppgift 2, "Multilingual Emoji Prediction" delad uppgift utförd av Semeval-2018. I uppgiften märks en förutspådd emoji baserad på en bit Twitter-text under 20 olika klasser (oftast använda emojis) där dessa klasser lärs och vidare förutspås görs för osynlig Twitter-text. I detta arbete har vi experimenterat och analyserat emojis som förutspåtts utifrån Twittertext, som ett klassificeringsproblem där emojis som medför betraktas som en etikett för varje enskild textdata. Vi har implementerat detta med hjälp av distribuerad representation av text via fastText. Vi har också gjort en insats för att visa hur fastText ramverk kan vara användbart vid emoji förutsägelse. Denna uppgift är uppdelad i två underuppgifter, de är baserade på datauppsättningar som presenteras på två olika språk engelska och spanska.', 'sr': 'Emoji je jedan od \'najbržih rastućih jezika\' u pop-kulturi, posebno u društvenim medijima, i veoma je vjerojatno da će njegova upotreba smanjiti. To se uopšte koristi za donošenje dodatnog nivoa znaèaja tekstima koji su postavljeni na platformama društvenih medija. Uz obezbeđenje takvih dodatnih informacija, daje više uvjeta prostom tekstu, koji se pojavljuje na skrivenoj interpretaciji unutar teksta. Ovaj papir objašnjava našu analizu o zadatku 2, "dionicama višejezičkog Emoji predviđanja koja je provedena polovičnim rokom 2018. U tom zadatku, predviđeni emoji koji se temelji na komadu teksta Twitter-a nalaze se ispod 20 različitih klasa (najčešće korištenih emoja) gde se ovi klasi nauče i dalje predviđaju se za nevidljivi tekst Twitter-a. U ovom poslu smo eksperimentirali i analizirali emoje predviđene na temelju teksta Twitter, kao problem klasifikacije u kojem se uključujući emoji smatra etiketom za svaki pojedinačni tekst podatak. Implicirali smo ovo sa raspodijeljenim predstavljanjem teksta preko FastText. Takođe, pokušali smo da pokažemo koliko brzi okvir teksta može biti korisan u slučaju predviđanja emoji. Ovaj zadatak je podeljen na dva podpitanja, zasnovan je na setu podataka predstavljenoj na dva različita jezika engleskog i španjolskog.', 'no': 'Emoji er ein av dei «raskeste voksne språket» i pop-kulturen, spesielt i sosiale medier, og det er svært sannsynleg for å minne bruken av dei. Dette er vanlegvis brukt for å få eit ekstra meningsnivå til tekstane som er poste på sosiale mediaplattformar. Dersom det gjev ei tilleggsinformasjon, gjev fleire innsyningar til den enkle teksten, som fører til gøymde tolkinga i teksten. Denne papiret forklarer analysen vårt om oppgåva 2, « delt av fleirspråk Emoji Prediction » delt oppgåva av halvåld-2018. I oppgåva vert eit foregåve emoji basert på eit stykke av Twitter-tekst merket under 20 forskjellige klasser (mest vanleg brukte emojis) der desse klassene vert lært og framtida blir lagt for ukjende Twitter-tekst. I denne arbeida har vi eksperimentert og analysert emojis forventa basert på Twitter-tekst, som eit klassifikasjonsproblem der det inneheld emoji vert kalla som etikett for kvar enkelt tekstdata. Vi har implementert dette med distribuert representasjon av tekst gjennom raskt tekst. Vi har også forstått å visa kor raskt tekstrammeverket kan vera nyttig i tilfelle for emoji-forhåndsvising. Denne oppgåva er delt inn i to underspørjingar. Dei er basert på datasettet presentert på to ulike språk engelsk og spansk.', 'si': "එමෝජියා පොප් සංස්කෘතියෙන් 'වේගම වැඩි භාෂාව' එකක්, විශේෂයෙන් සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමේන්ත්\u200dරයෙන් ඉ මේවා සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම භාවිත වෙනවා පාළුවන්ට විතරක් අදහසක් ගෙනියන්න, සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප අනිවාර්ය සම්පූර්ණ තොරතුරු දෙන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය පාළුවෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවේශනය දෙන්න, පාළුවේ ඇතුලේ  මේ පැත්තේ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරන්නේ වැඩක් 2, ' ගොඩක් භාෂාභාෂික එමෝජි ප්\u200dරධා කාර්යයෙන්, ට්විටර් පාළුවක් අධිරූපයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් පාළුවක් 20ක් පහළට ලේබල් කරලා තියෙන්නේ (සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිත මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා ට්විටර් පාළුවේ අධිරූපයෙන් විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, වර්ගය ප්\u200dරශ් අපි මේක ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ FastText වලින් විතරයින් පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. ඒවගේම, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මෝජි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කොහොමද වේගයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. මේ වැඩක් විශේෂ දෙකට වෙනස් කරනවා, ඔවුන් වෙනස් භාෂාවක් දෙකට ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් භාෂාවක", 'ta': "பாப்கலாச்சாரத்தில், குறைவாக சமூக ஊடகங்களில் 'வேகமான வளர்ச்சி மொழி' என்பது எமோஜி தான் ஒரு மொழி. இது பொதுவாக உபயோகிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, சமூக ஊடகம் தளங்களில் போடப்பட்ட உரைகளுக்கு கூடுதல் நிலையை கொண்டுவருவது. இவ்வாறு சேர்க்கப்பட்ட தகவல் வழங்குகிறது, வெறும் உரைக்கு அதிக பார்வைகளை கொடுக்கும், உரையில் மறைந்து விளக் இந்த காகிதத்தில் செம்வால்- 2018 ஆல் செய்யப்பட்ட எங்கள் செயல் 2 மேல் எங்கள் ஆய்வு விளக்கம் கூறுகிறது 'பல மொழி எமோயி முன்னாட இந்த செயலில், ஒரு முன்வார்க்கப்பட்ட உணம்ஜி துவகுப்பு உரையை அடிப்படையில் 20 வேறு வகுப்புகளில் (பொதுவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட emojis) குறிப்பிடப்படுகிறது. அவ இந்த வேலையில், நாங்கள் அனைத்து உரை தகவல்களுக்கும் ஒரு சிறப்பு பிரச்சனையாக முயற்சித்துள்ளோம் மற்றும் ஆய்வு செய்துள்ளோம். விரைவான உரையில் உள்ள உரையின் பகிர்ந்த உரையை பயன்படுத்தி இதை நாம் செயல்படுத்தியுள்ளோம். Also, we have made an effort to demonstrate how fastText framework can be useful in case of emoji prediction.  இந்த செயல் இரண்டு துணை பணியாக பிரிக்கப்பட்டது, அவை இரண்டு வேறு வித்தியாசமான மொழிகளிலும் ஸ்பானிஷிலும் கொடுக", 'ur': 'ایموجی پوپ-فرهنگ میں "تیز ترین بڑھنے کی زبان" میں سے ایک ہے، مخصوصاً سوسیل میڈیا میں اور اس کے استعمال میں بہت ہی کمی نہیں ہے۔ یہ معنی اضافہ لانے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں، جو سوسیل میڈیا پٹروم پر پوسٹ کئے جاتے ہیں. اس طرح اضافہ ہوئی معلومات کی اطلاعات دیتی ہے، صریح معلومات کو زیادہ بصیرت دیتی ہے، جو متن کے اندر چھپائی تعبیر کی وجہ سے ہوتی ہے. یہ کاغذ ہماری تحلیل ٹاکس 2 کے بارے میں تفصیل کرتا ہے، \'بہت سی زبان ایموجی پردیکت\' کے شریک پوچھ جو نصف وصول-2018 سے کیا گیا ہے۔ اس کام میں ایک پیش بینی ایموجی ٹویٹر کی ایک ٹکڑی پر بنیاد رکھی گئی ہے 20 مختلف کلاس کے نیچے لکھی جاتی ہے جہاں یہ کلاس سکھائی جاتی ہیں اور اس سے زیادہ پیش بینی کی جاتی ہے ٹویٹر کے متن کے لئے۔ اس کام میں، ہم نے ٹویٹر ٹیکسٹ پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے ایموجیس کی آزمائش اور تحقیق کی ہے، ایک کلاسیفوں مسئلہ کے طور پر جہاں جمع ہونے والی ایموجی ہر شخص ٹیکسٹ ڈیٹ کے لئے لیبل سمجھی جاتی ہے. ہم نے اسے fastText کے ذریعہ سے تقسیم کیا ہے۔ اور ہم نے ایک کوشش کی ہے کہ نشان دکھائیں کہ کس طرح سریع ٹیکسٹ فورمک مفید ہو سکتا ہے یہ کام دو سپٹ پرس میں تقسیم ہوا ہے، وہ دو مختلف زبانوں میں انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی میں پیش کیے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Emoji pop-culturiyasida eng tez bo'lgan tillardan biri, hususan jamiyat media'da, bu foydalanishni kamaytirish juda ham kamid emas. Ushbu oddiy narsa jamiyat media platformlarida postlangan matnlarni qo'shimcha ma'nosini olish uchun ishlatiladi. @ info Bu sahifa 2 Vazifaning tashkilotlarimizni o'rganadi, Semeval-2018 tomonidan boshlangan bir necha tillar Emoji Diqqat soʻzlarimizni o'rganadi. Vazifani, Twitter matnning bir qismda qo'shilgan emoji 20 boshqa sinfga (oddiy foydalaniladigan emojis) qo'llaniladi. Bu sinflar o'rganadi va keyin oldin ichki Twitter matn uchun ishlatiladi. Bu ishda, biz Twitterda matn asosida hisoblangan emojisni tajriba qildik va taʼminlovchi qildik, bir xil matn maʼlumot uchun hisoblash muammolari deb o'ylaymiz. Biz buni fast Matn orqali tarqatish matnni ishlatdik. Шунингдек, биз фойдаланишимизни кўрсатиш учун тез текст жиҳатидан фойдаланишини кўрсатиш учун ҳаракат қилдик. Bu vazifa ikkita sub vazifaga qaytadi. Ular ikkita xil tilda ingliz va Ispanchaga koʻrsatilgan maʼlumot setiga asoslangan.", 'vi': 'Emoji là một trong những ngôn ngữ phát triển nhanh nhất trong nền văn hóa pop, được ưu tiên bởi truyền thông xã hội và rất khó để nó bị giảm. Những thứ này thường được dùng để mang thêm ý nghĩa về các văn bản, được đăng trên các nền truyền thông xã hội. Cung cấp thông tin thêm như vậy, cung cấp thêm thông tin về văn bản rõ ràng, phát triển cho sự hiểu biết ẩn giấu bên trong văn bản. Bài báo này giải thích phân tích về Nhiệm vụ 2, "cổ phần đa ngôn của Emoji prediction" Trong nhiệm vụ, một biểu tượng đa dạng được dự đoán dựa trên một đoạn trên Twitter được đánh dấu dưới hàng chục lớp khác nhau (biểu tượng đa cảm được dùng thường) nơi những lớp này được học và những dự đoán được tạo ra cho văn bản Twitter vô hình. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đã thử nghiệm và phân tích những biểu tượng biểu tượng dựa trên Twitter, như một vấn đề phân loại nơi biểu tượng ẩm thấp được coi là một nhãn hiệu cho mỗi dữ liệu văn bản cá nhân. Chúng tôi đã thực hiện nó bằng cách phân phối văn bản qua nhanh. Chúng tôi cũng đã cố gắng để chứng minh hệ thống chữ nhanh có thể hữu dụng trong trường hợp có dự đoán về biểu tượng. Nhiệm vụ này được chia thành hai phần nhỏ, chúng dựa trên bộ dữ liệu được trình bày bằng hai ngôn ngữ khác nhau Anh và Tây Ban Nha.', 'nl': "Emoji is een van de snelst groeiende talen in de popcultuur, vooral in sociale media en het is zeer onwaarschijnlijk dat het gebruik ervan afneemt. Deze worden meestal gebruikt om een extra betekenisniveau te brengen aan de teksten, geplaatst op social media platforms. Het verstrekken van zo'n toegevoegde informatie geeft meer inzicht in de platte tekst, resulterend in verborgen interpretatie binnen de tekst. Dit artikel legt onze analyse uit over Taak 2, 'Meertalige Emoji Prediction' sharedtask uitgevoerd door Semeval-2018. In de taak wordt een voorspelde emoji op basis van een stukje Twitter-tekst gelabeld onder 20 verschillende klassen (meestal gebruikte emoji's) waar deze klassen worden geleerd en verder worden voorspeld voor onzichtbare Twitter-tekst. In dit werk hebben we emoji's geëxperimenteerd en geanalyseerd die zijn voorspeld op basis van Twitter-tekst, als een classificatieprobleem waarbij de bijbehorende emoji wordt beschouwd als een label voor elke individuele tekstgegevens. We hebben dit geïmplementeerd met behulp van gedistribueerde weergave van tekst via fastText. Ook hebben we geprobeerd om aan te tonen hoe fastText framework nuttig kan zijn in geval van emoji voorspelling. Deze taak is verdeeld in twee subtaken, ze zijn gebaseerd op dataset gepresenteerd in twee verschillende talen Engels en Spaans.", 'hr': "Emoji je jedan od 'najbržih rastućih jezika' u pop-kulturi, posebno u društvenim medijima i nije vjerojatno da će se koristiti smanjiti. To se uobičajeno koristi za donošenje dodatne razine značenja tekstima koje su postavljene na platformama društvenih medija. Uz pružanje takvih dodatnih informacija, pruža više uvjeta običnom tekstu, koji uzrokuje skrivenu interpretaciju unutar teksta. Ovaj papir objašnjava našu analizu o zadatku 2. „dionica višejezičkih Emoji predviđanja poduzetnih polovičnim vijekovima 2018.“ U tom zadatku, predviđeni emoji koji se temelji na dijelu teksta Twitter-a označavaju ispod 20 različitih klasa (najčešće korištenih emoja) gdje se te klase uče i dalje predviđaju se za nevidljivi tekst Twitter-a. U ovom poslu smo eksperimentirali i analizirali emoje predviđene na temelju teksta Twitter-a, kao problem klasifikacije u kojem se uključujući emoji smatra etiketom za svaki pojedinačni tekst podatak. Provedli smo to s obzirom na raspodjeljenu predstavu teksta preko fastText. Također, pokušali smo pokazati kako je FastText okvir korisan u slučaju predviđanja emoji. Ovaj zadatak se podijeli na dva podpitanja, temeljeni su na podacima predstavljenim na dva različita jezika engleskog i španjolskog.", 'bg': 'Емоджи е един от "най-бързо развиващите се езици" в попкултурата, особено в социалните медии и е много малко вероятно употребата му да намалее. Те обикновено се използват за придаване на допълнително ниво на значение на текстовете, публикувани в платформите на социалните медии. Предоставянето на такава добавена информация дава повече прозрения за обикновения текст, произтичащ от скрито тълкуване в текста. Тази статия обяснява нашия анализ на задача 2, "Многоезична прогноза за емоджи", споделена задача, проведена от Семевал-2018. В задачата прогнозираните емоджи базирани на парче текст в Туитър са обозначени под 20 различни класа (най-често използвани емоджи), където тези класове се научават и по-нататък се предвиждат за невидим текст в Туитър. В тази работа експериментирахме и анализирахме прогнозираните емоджита на базата на текст в Туитър, като проблем за класификация, при който съпътстващите емоджи се разглеждат като етикет за всеки отделен текст данни. Изпълнихме това с помощта на разпределено представяне на текст чрез фастТекст. Също така положихме усилия да демонстрираме как рамката може да бъде полезна в случай на прогнозиране на емоджи. Тази задача е разделена на две подзадачи, те се основават на набор от данни, представен на два различни езика английски и испански.', 'da': 'Emoji er et af de "hurtigst voksende sprog" i popkultur, især i sociale medier, og det er meget usandsynligt, at dets brug falder. Disse bruges generelt til at give teksterne et ekstra niveau af betydning, der er lagt op på sociale medier platforme. At give sådan en ekstra information, giver mere indsigt i den almindelige tekst, der opstår til skjult fortolkning i teksten. Denne artikel forklarer vores analyse af opgave 2, "Multilingual Emoji Prediction" delt opgave udført af Semeval-2018. I opgaven er en forudsiget emoji baseret på et stykke Twitter-tekst mærket under 20 forskellige klasser (mest almindeligt anvendte emojis), hvor disse klasser læres og yderligere forudsiges er lavet til uset Twitter-tekst. I dette arbejde har vi eksperimenteret og analyseret forudsigede emojis baseret på Twitter-tekst, som et klassifikationsproblem, hvor den medfølgende emoji betragtes som en etiket for hver enkelt tekstdata. Vi har implementeret dette ved hjælp af distribueret repræsentation af tekst gennem fastText. Vi har også gjort en indsats for at demonstrere, hvordan fastText framework kan være nyttigt i tilfælde af emoji forudsigelse. Denne opgave er opdelt i to underopgaver, de er baseret på datasæt præsenteret på to forskellige sprog engelsk og spansk.', 'de': "Emoji ist eine der am schnellsten wachsenden Sprachen in der Popkultur, insbesondere in den sozialen Medien und es ist sehr unwahrscheinlich, dass ihre Verwendung abnimmt. Diese werden in der Regel verwendet, um den Texten, die auf Social-Media-Plattformen gepostet werden, eine zusätzliche Bedeutungsebene zu verleihen. Die Bereitstellung einer solchen zusätzlichen Information gibt mehr Einblicke in den Klartext, was zu einer versteckten Interpretation innerhalb des Textes führt. Dieses Papier erläutert unsere Analyse zu Task 2, ‚Multilingual Emoji Prediction' Sharedtask von Semeval-2018. In der Aufgabe wird ein vorhergesagtes Emoji, das auf einem Stück Twitter-Text basiert, unter 20 verschiedenen Klassen (am häufigsten verwendete Emojis) gekennzeichnet, in denen diese Klassen gelernt und weiter vorhergesagt werden, für unsichtbaren Twitter-Text gemacht werden. In dieser Arbeit haben wir Emojis experimentiert und analysiert, die auf Basis von Twitter-Text vorhergesagt wurden, als Klassifizierungsproblem, bei dem das resultierende Emoji als Label für jede einzelne Textdatei betrachtet wird. Wir haben dies mittels verteilter Textdarstellung durch fastText umgesetzt. Außerdem haben wir uns bemüht zu demonstrieren, wie fastText Framework im Falle der Emoji-Vorhersage nützlich sein kann. Diese Aufgabe ist in zwei Teilaufgaben unterteilt, die auf Datensätzen basieren, die in zwei verschiedenen Sprachen Englisch und Spanisch präsentiert werden.", 'ko': "이모티콘은 유행 문화에서 가장 빨리 성장하는 언어 중 하나로 특히 소셜 미디어에서는 사용량이 줄어들 수 없다.이런 정보는 보통 소셜 미디어 플랫폼에 발표된 텍스트에 추가적인 의미를 부여하는 데 쓰인다.이러한 추가 정보를 제공하면 순수한 텍스트에 대해 더 많은 통찰을 하고 텍스트에 숨겨진 해석을 할 수 있다.본고는 Semeval-2018에서 진행된 임무 2의'다국어 표정 예측'공유 임무에 대한 분석을 설명한다.이 작업에서 트위터 텍스트의 예측 표정을 바탕으로 20개의 다른 유형(가장 자주 사용하는 표정)에 표시하고 이 유형에서 이 유형을 배워 보이지 않는 트위터 텍스트를 한층 더 예측한다.이 작업에서 트위터 텍스트 예측을 바탕으로 한 표정을 실험하고 분석한 결과 분류 문제로 포함된 표정은 모든 텍스트 데이터의 라벨로 간주되었다.fastText를 통해 텍스트의 분포식 표시를 실현했습니다.이 밖에fastText 프레임워크가 표정 예측에 어떤 역할을 하는지 보여주기 위해 노력하고 있다.이 임무는 영어와 스페인어 두 가지 서로 다른 언어로 표현된 데이터 집합을 바탕으로 두 개의 하위 임무로 나뉜다.", 'id': "Emoji adalah salah satu 'bahasa tumbuh paling cepat' dalam budaya pop, terutama dalam media sosial dan sangat tidak mungkin untuk penggunaannya menurun. Ini biasanya digunakan untuk membawa tingkat tambahan arti untuk teks, ditempatkan di platform media sosial. Menyediakan informasi tambahan seperti itu, memberikan lebih banyak penglihatan ke teks biasa, muncul untuk interpretasi tersembunyi dalam teks. This paper explains our analysis on Task 2, ' Multilingual Emoji Prediction' sharedtask conducted by Semeval-2018.  Dalam tugas ini, emoji diprediksi berdasarkan sepotong teks Twitter ditabel di bawah 20 kelas yang berbeda (emoji yang paling sering digunakan) di mana kelas ini belajar dan diprediksi lebih lanjut dibuat untuk teks Twitter yang tidak terlihat. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami telah eksperimen dan menganalisis emoji yang diprediksi berdasarkan teks Twitter, sebagai masalah klasifikasi di mana emoji yang mengandung dianggap sebagai label untuk setiap data teks individu. Kami telah mengimplementasikan ini menggunakan representation distribusi teks melalui FasText. Juga, kami telah berusaha untuk menunjukkan betapa cepatTextframework dapat berguna dalam kasus prediksi emoji. Tugas ini dibagi menjadi dua subtask, mereka berdasarkan dataset yang dipaparkan dalam dua bahasa bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol yang berbeda.", 'tr': "Emoji pop-kulturada 'iň çalt ösýän dilden biri, ýöne sosyal medýýatlarda we onuň ulanmasynyň azalmagy üçin gaty mümkin däldir. Bular adatça sosial media platformlarynda ýagdaý bir näme diýmek üçin ullanýarlar. Böyle bir eklenýän maglumat täblisaň, düz metin üçin köp pikirleri girýär. Metin içinde gizlenýän terjime täblisaň. Bu kagyz biziň 2-nji zady hakynda 'Çoklu dilli Emoji Prediksiýasynyň orta soragymyzy' çykarýar. Bu işde, Twitter metiniň bir parçasyna daýanýan emoji 20 dürli synpyň a şagynda diýilip atlandyrylýar (iň köplen ullanýan emoji) bu synpyň öwrenmegi we Twitter metini görmedik üçin öňüne getirilýär. Bu işde, biz Twitter metinde daýanýan emojilary denedik we çözümlendik. Emojiler her metin maglumaty üçin etiket diýip kabul edilýärler. Biz bu şekilde FastText vasitəsilə bölünen metin suratını kullanarak implemente etdik. Munuň üçin emoji öňünden nähili täsirli Metin çerçevesiniň ullanyşyny görkezmek üçin synanyşdyrdyk. Bu zady iki altsorag bilen bölüşdirilýär. Olar iki beýleki dilde anglisçe we español dilinde sunulan veri setine dayanýarlar.", 'fa': 'اموژی یکی از «سریع\u200cترین زبان رشد» در فرهنگ پاپ است، مخصوصا در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی و بسیار احتمال نیست که استفاده از آن کمتر شود. این\u200cها معمولاً برای آوردن یک سطح معنی اضافه به متن\u200cها استفاده می\u200cشوند که روی platformهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی بفرسته می\u200cشوند. با توجه به این اطلاعات اضافه شده، به متن معمولی بیشتری مشاهده می\u200cکند، که به تفسیر مخفی در متن می\u200cرود. این کاغذ تحلیل ما در مورد وظیفه ۲ توضیح داده می\u200cشود، سهم\u200cپرسیدن اموژی\u200cهای متعدد زبان ۲۰۱۸. در این وظیفه، یک ایموجی پیش\u200cبینی بر اساس یک قطعه از متن توئیتر زیر ۲۰ کلاس متفاوت (معمولاً از ایموجی استفاده می\u200cشود) که این کلاس\u200cها یاد می\u200cگیرند و پیش\u200cبینی بیشتر برای متن توئیتر نامیده می\u200cشوند. در این کار، ما emoji را آزمایش و تحلیل کرده\u200cایم که بر اساس متن توئیتر پیش بینی شده است، به عنوان مشکل جداسازی که emoji شامل آن است به عنوان نقاشی برای هر داده\u200cی متن فردی برگزیده می\u200cشود. ما این را با استفاده از نمایش توزیع متن به طریق FastText انجام دادیم. همچنین، ما تلاش کردیم تا نشان دهیم چقدر چهار چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها این وظیفه به دو سوپرسی تقسیم می\u200cشود، بر اساس مجموعه داده\u200cها در دو زبان مختلف انگلیسی و اسپانیایی است.', 'sw': "Emoji ni moja ya ‘lugha inayokua kwa haraka’ katika utamaduni wa watu, hasa katika mitandao ya kijamii na haiwezekani kwa matumizi yake kupungua. Hizi kwa ujumla huwa zinatumiwa kuleta kiwango cha ziada cha maana kwa maana, kilichowekwa kwenye majukwaa ya mitandao ya kijamii. Kutoa taarifa kama hizi za kuongezeka, inatoa macho zaidi kwa maandishi ya wazi, yanayosababisha tafsiri ya kujificha ndani ya maandishi. Makala hii inaeleza uchambuzi wetu kwenye kazi ya 2, 'Utawala wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji' ulioandaliwa na Semeval-2018. Katika kazi hiyo, emoji anayetabiriwa kutokana na makala ya ujumbe wa Twita inatajwa chini ya darasa 20 tofauti (ambazo mara nyingi hutumiwa emojis) ambapo darasa hizi zinajifunza na kutabiriwa zaidi zinatengenezwa kwa ajili ya ujumbe wa twita wa siri. Katika kazi hii, tumejaribu na kuchambua emojis ilitabiriwa kwa kutumia ujumbe wa Twita, kama tatizo la kutangaza hisia ambapo hisia zinachukuliwa kama alama kwa kila taarifa za maandishi. Tumetekeleza hii kwa kutumia uwakilishaji wa maandishi kwa njia ya haraka. Pia, tumefanya juhudi za kuonyesha namna mfumo wa mfumo wa Mataifa wa haraka unavyoweza kuwa na manufaa kama utabiri wa emoji. This task is divide into two subtask, they are based on dataset presented in two different languages English and Spanish.", 'am': "ኢዮጂ በpop-culture፣ በተለየ በማኅበራዊ አውታር ውስጥ ከፈጥኖው ቋንቋ አንዱ ነው፡፡ እነዚህ በጦማሪያው ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ፕላጦማር ላይ የተጻፈውን የጨማሪውን አዋጅ ለማምጣት ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ Providing such an added info, gives more insights to the plain text, arising to hidden interpretation within the text.  ይህ ገጽ በስራ 2፣ 'የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ኢዮጂ ፕሬዝዳንት' የተፈጸመ የስሜቪል-2018 ተሳካሚ ጥያቄን ይናገራል፡፡ በትዊተር ጽሑፍ ላይ የተመሳሳይ ኢሞጂ ከ20 የተለየ ደረጃዎች በታች (አብዛኛቸው የተጠቃሚ ኢሜጂ) የተለየ እና ደግሞ ለተሰወረ በትዊተር ጽሑፍ የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ ኢሜጂን በትዊተር ጽሑፍ በመጠቀም የተፈተናውን እና የመረመከርን መፍትሄ፣ የኢሜጂን መግለጫ ለሁሉም የጽሑፍ ዳታዎች ማህበራዊ መሆኑን እንደሚያሳየው መክፈቻ ነው፡፡ የጽሑፍ መልዕክት በጾም ጽሑፍ የተካፈለ ነው፡፡ እናም የጽሑፍ ፍሬም እንዴት እንደሚጠቅመው ይቻላል ብለን ለማሳየት ተሞክረናል፡፡ ይሄ ስራ በሁለት ደብዳቤዎች ውስጥ የተካፈለ ነው፤ በሁለት ልዩ ቋንቋዎች እንግሊዝና ስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ የተገኘ የዳታ setተቶች በመሠረት ነው።", 'af': 'Emoji is een van die \'vinnigste groei taal \' in pop- kultuur, veral in sosiale media en dit is baie onwaarskynlik vir sy gebruik om te verklein. Hierdie word gewoonlik gebruik om \'n ekstra vlak van betekening aan die teks te bring, wat op sosiale media platforme gestuur word. Die verskaffing van sodanige \'n bygevoeg inligting, gee meer inligtings aan die eenvoudige teks, wat opstaan na verborge inligting binne die teks. Hierdie papier verduidelik ons analiseer op Opdrag 2, " Multilingual Emoji Prediction" deelde vraag wat deur die semievaal-2018 gedoen is. In die taak is \'n voorskoude emoji gebaseer op \'n stuk van Twitter teks gemerk onder 20 verskillende klasse (mees gewoonlik gebruikte emojis) waar hierdie klasse leer word en verder voorskou word gemaak vir ongesien Twitter teks. In hierdie werk het ons eksperimenteer en analiseer emojis voorskou gebaseer op Twitter-teks, as \'n klasifikasie probleem waar die inhouderde emoji aangeneem word as \'n etiket vir elke individuele teks data. Ons het hierdie gebruik met verspreidige voorstelling van teks deur fastText. Ons het ook \'n versoek gemaak om te wys hoe vaste Teks raamwerk nuttig kan wees in geval van emoji voorskou. Hierdie taak is deel in twee subvraag, hulle is gebaseer op datastel voorgestel in twee verskillende tale Engels en Spaanse.', 'hy': 'Էմոջան ամենաարագ աճող լեզուներից մեկն է Pop-մշակույթի մեջ, հատկապես սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում, և շատ անհավանական է, որ դրա օգտագործումը նվազի: Սրանք սովորաբար օգտագործվում են սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պլատֆորմաններում տեղադրված տեքստների համար ավելին իմաստալից: Այսպիսի ավելացված տեղեկատվություն տրամադրելը ավելի շատ իմաստություն է տալիս պարզ տեքստին, որը առաջանում է տեքստի թաքնված մեկնաբանության արդյունքում: Այս հոդվածը բացատրում է մեր վերլուծությունը 2րդ հանձնարարության մասին, որը կատարվել է 2018 թվականի կեսնամյակի կողմից: Դրա ընթացքում Թվիթերի տեքստի վրա հիմնված կանխատեսված էմոջան պիտակ է տալիս 20 տարբեր դասի (ամենահաճախ օգտագործված էմոջան), որտեղ այս դասերը սովորվում են և ավելի շատ կանխատեսվում են անտեսանելի Թվիթերի տեքստի համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք փորձեցինք և վերլուծեցինք էմոիզներ, որոնք կանխատեսված էին Թվիթերի տեքստի վրա, որպես դասակարգման խնդիր, որտեղ ներառող էմոիզները համարվում են յուրաքանչյուր անհատական տեքստի տվյալների պիտակ: Մենք կիրառել ենք սա օգտագործելով տեքստի բաշխված ներկայացումը արագ տեքստի միջոցով: Մենք նաև փորձել ենք ցույց տալ, թե ինչքան արագ կարող է տեքստի շրջանակը օգտակար լինել էմոջի կանխատեսման դեպքում: Այս խնդիրը բաժանվում է երկու ենթահարցերով, դրանք հիմնված են երկու տարբեր լեզուներով անգլերեն և իսպաներեն ներկայացված տվյալների համակարգի վրա:', 'bn': "পপ-সংস্কৃতিতে ইমোজি সবচেয়ে দ্রুত বৃদ্ধি ভাষার মধ্যে একটি ভাষা, বিশেষ করে সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় এবং তার ব্যবহার কমানোর জন্য এটা খু এগুলো সাধারণত সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্ল্যাটফর্মে পোস্ট করা লেখাগুলোর মানে বাড়তে ব্যবহার করা হয়। এই ধরনের যোগ করা তথ্য প্রদান করে, সাধারণ টেক্সটে আরও দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করে, যা লেখার ভেতরে লুকিয়ে রাখা ব্যাখ্ এই পত্রিকাটি আমাদের কাজ ২-এ ব্যাখ্যা করেছে 'মাল্টিভাল ইমোজি প্রেসিডেশন' শেয়ার করেছে যা সেমেভাল-২০১৮-এ করা হয়েছে। কাজে টুইটারের একটি টুইটার টেক্সটের ভিত্তিতে একটি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী ইমোজি লেবেল করা হয়েছে (সাধারণত ইমোজিক ব্যবহার করা হয়) যেখানে এই শ্রেণীগুলো শিক্ এই কাজে আমরা টুইটারের টেক্সট ভিত্তিতে ইমোজিকে পরীক্ষা করেছি এবং বিশ্লেষণ করেছি, যেখানে একটি শ্রেণীকরণ সমস্যা হিসেবে যেখানে ইমোজিকে প্রত্ দ্রুত টেক্সটের মাধ্যমে বিতরণের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে আমরা এটি বাস্তবায়িত করেছি। এছাড়াও, আমরা প্রচেষ্টা করেছি প্রদর্শন করার জন্য যে ইমোজি ভবিষ্যতের ক্ষেত্রে কতটা দ্রুত টেক্সট ফ্রেম কার্যক্রম ক এই কাজটি দুই সাবক্ষেত্রে ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিত্তিতে তারা ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিত্তিতে", 'bs': "Emoji je jedan od 'najbržih rastućih jezika' u pop-kulturi, posebno u društvenim medijima, i nije vjerojatno da će se koristiti smanjiti. To se uopšte koristi za donošenje dodatnog nivoa značenja tekstima, postavljene na platformama društvenih medija. S obzirom na takvu dodanu informaciju, pruža više uvida prostom tekstu, koji se pojavljuje na skrivenoj interpretaciji unutar teksta. Ovaj papir objašnjava našu analizu o zadatku 2, „dionica višejezičkih Emoji predviđanja koja je provedena pola veka-2018. U tom zadatku, predviđeni emoji koji se temelji na komadu teksta Twitter-a nalaze se ispod 20 različitih klasa (najčešće korištenih emoja) gdje se ovi klasi uče i dalje predviđaju se za nevidljivi tekst Twitter-a. U ovom poslu smo eksperimentirali i analizirali emoje predviđene na temelju teksta Twitter-a, kao problem klasifikacije u kojem se uključujući emoji smatra etiketom za svaki pojedinačni tekst podatak. Proveli smo ovo s obzirom na raspodjeljenu predstavu teksta preko FastText. Također, pokušali smo pokazati kako je FastText okvir korisan u slučaju predviđanja emoji. Ovaj zadatak se podijeli na dva podpitanja, zasnovani su na setu podataka predstavljenom na dva različita jezika engleskog i španjolskog.", 'cs': 'Emoji je jedním z "nejrychleji rostoucích jazyků v popkultuře, zejména v sociálních médiích a je velmi nepravděpodobné, že se jeho používání sníží. Ty se obecně používají k přinášení další úrovně významu textů zveřejněných na platformách sociálních médií. Poskytnutí takových přidaných informací poskytuje více pohledů na prostý text, což vyplývá z skryté interpretace v textu. Tento článek vysvětluje naši analýzu úkolu 2, ‚Multilingual Emoji Prediction\' sharedtask provedený společností Semeval-2018. V úkolu jsou předpokládané emoji založené na části textu Twitteru označeny pod dvaceti různými třídami (nejčastěji používané emoji), kde se tyto třídy učí a dále předpovídají jsou vytvořeny pro neviditelný text Twitteru. V této práci jsme experimentovali a analyzovali emoji predikované na základě textu Twitteru, což je klasifikační problém, při kterém je emoji považováno za štítek pro každá jednotlivá textová data. Toto jsme implementovali pomocí distribuované reprezentace textu prostřednictvím fastText. Také jsme se snažili ukázat, jak fastText framework může být užitečný v případě predikce emoji. Tento úkol je rozdělen do dvou podúkolů, které jsou založeny na datové sadě prezentované ve dvou různých jazycích angličtina a španělština.', 'sq': "Emoji is one of the 'fastest growing language ' in pop-culture, especially in social media and it is very unlikely for its usage to decrease.  These are generally used to bring an extra level of meaning to the texts, posted on social media platforms.  Duke dhënë një informacion të tillë shtuar, jep më shumë kuptime për tekstin e thjeshtë, që vjen nga interpretimi i fshehur brenda tekstit. This paper explains our analysis on Task 2, ' Multilingual Emoji Prediction' sharedtask conducted by Semeval-2018.  In the task, a predicted emoji based on a piece of Twitter text are labelled under 20 different classes (most commonly used emojis) where these classes are learnt and further predicted are made for unseen Twitter text.  In this work, we have experimented and analysed emojis predicted based on Twitter text, as a classification problem where the entailing emoji is considered as a label for every individual text data.  Ne e kemi zbatuar këtë duke përdorur përfaqësimin e shpërndarë të tekstit nëpërmjet FastText. Also, we have made an effort to demonstrate how fastText framework can be useful in case of emoji prediction.  This task is divide into two subtask, they are based on dataset presented in two different languages English and Spanish.", 'et': 'Emoji on popkultuuris üks kiiremini kasvavaid keeli, eriti sotsiaalmeedias ja selle kasutamine väheneb väga ebatõenäoliselt. Neid kasutatakse tavaliselt sotsiaalmeedia platvormidel postitatud tekstide lisamiseks. Sellise lisateabe pakkumine annab rohkem ülevaadet lihttekstist, mis tuleneb teksti varjatud tõlgendamisest. Käesolevas dokumendis selgitatakse meie analüüsi ülesande 2, "Mitmekeelne emoji prognoos" jagatud ülesande kohta Semeval-2018. Ülesandes märgitakse Twitteri tekstil põhinev prognoositav emoji 20 erineva klassi alla (kõige sagedamini kasutatavad emojid), kus neid klasse õpitakse ja edaspidi prognoositakse nähtamatu Twitteri teksti jaoks. Käesolevas töös oleme eksperimenteerinud ja analüüsinud Twitteri tekstil prognoositud emojisid klassifitseerimisprobleemina, kus sellega kaasnevat emojid peetakse iga üksiku tekstiandme sildiks. Oleme seda rakendanud kasutades teksti hajutatud esitamist läbi fastText. Samuti oleme püüdnud näidata, kuidas fastText raamistik võib olla kasulik emoji ennustamise korral. See ülesanne on jagatud kaheks alamülesandeks, need põhinevad andmekogumil, mis on esitatud kahes erinevas keeles inglise ja hispaania.', 'fi': 'Emoji on yksi popkulttuurin nopeimmin kasvavista kielistä, erityisesti sosiaalisessa mediassa, ja sen käyttö on hyvin epätodennäköistä. Näitä käytetään yleensä tuomaan sosiaalisen median alustoilla julkaistuille teksteille lisäsisältöä. Tällaisen lisätyn tiedon antaminen antaa enemmän oivalluksia yksinkertaiseen tekstiin, joka johtuu piilotetusta tulkinnasta tekstissä. Tässä artikkelissa selitämme analyysimme Semeval-2018:n suorittamasta tehtävästä 2, "Monikielinen Emoji Ennuste". Tehtävässä ennustettu Twitter-tekstiin perustuva emoji merkitään 20 eri luokkaan (yleisimmin käytetyt emojit), joissa nämä luokat opetetaan ja ennustetaan edelleen näkymättömälle Twitter-tekstille. Tässä työssä olemme kokeilleet ja analysoineet Twitter-tekstiin perustuvia ennustettuja emojija luokitteluongelmana, jossa niihin liittyvää emojia pidetään jokaisen yksittäisen tekstitiedon etikettinä. Olemme toteuttaneet tämän käyttämällä hajautettua tekstin esittämistä fastTextin kautta. Olemme myös pyrkineet osoittamaan, miten fastText framework voi olla hyödyllinen emoji-ennusteessa. Tämä tehtävä on jaettu kahteen alatehtävään, jotka perustuvat aineistoon, joka esitetään kahdella eri kielellä englanti ja espanja.', 'az': 'Emoji pop-kültüründə "ən hızlı artırmaq dilindən biridir", özlərinə də sosyal media içində və onun istifadəsini azaltmaq mümkün deyildir. Bunlar genellikle sosyal media platformlarında yayınlanmış mətnlərə çox məlumatı gətirmək üçün istifadə edilirlər. Əlavə edilən məlumatları təmin edərək, məlumatın içində gizlənməsi üçün açıq məlumat üçün daha çox nəzər verir. Bu kağıt bizim 2. Task analizimizi, \' çoxlu dil Emoji Prediction\' paylaşılığını 2018-ci yarısı ilə təşkil edir. Bu işdə, Twitter mətnlərin bir parçasına dayanan tədbir emoji 20 müxtəlif dəstələrin altında etiketlənir. Bu dəstələrin öyrəndiyi və daha tədbir edildiyi yerdə Twitter mətnlərinin görünmədiyi mətnlərin üçün etiketlənir. Bu işdə, Twitter metinə dayanan emoji təminatı və analizi təminatı etdik, içində olan emoji hər bir mətn məlumatının etiketi olaraq təminatı olaraq. Biz bunu fastText vasitəsilə dağıtılmış mətn göstəricisi ilə istifadə etdik. Həmçin in emoji tədbirlərində nə qədər hızlı Metin framework ünün faydalı olduğunu göstərmək üçün çalışdıq. Bu işin iki alt sorğu ilə bölüşdür, onlar iki müxtəlif dildə İngilizce və İspanyolca verilən verilən verilən qurbanlara dayanılır.', 'ca': 'L\'Emoji és una de les "llengües en creixement més ràpid" de la popcultura, especialment en els mitjans socials i és molt improbable que el seu ús diminui. These are generally used to bring an extra level of meaning to the texts, posted on social media platforms.  Providing such an added info, gives more insights to the plain text, arising to hidden interpretation within the text.  This paper explains our analysis on Task 2, \' Multilingual Emoji Prediction\' sharedtask conducted by Semeval-2018.  In the task, a predicted emoji based on a piece of Twitter text are labelled under 20 different classes (most commonly used emojis) where these classes are learnt and further predicted are made for unseen Twitter text.  En aquest treball hem experimentat i analitzat els emoji predits basant-nos en el text de Twitter, com un problem a de classificació on l\'emoji involucrat es considera una etiqueta per a cada data de text individual. Ho hem implementat fent servir la representació distribuïda del text a través de FasText. També hem fet un esforç per demostrar com de ràpid pot ser útil el marcText en cas de predicció emoji. This task is divide into two subtask, they are based on dataset presented in two different languages English and Spanish.', 'sk': 'Emoji je eden izmed "najhitreje rastočih jezikov" v pop kulturi, zlasti v družbenih omrežjih in je zelo malo verjetno, da bi se njegova uporaba zmanjšala. Ti se običajno uporabljajo za dodatno raven pomena besedil, objavljenih na platformah socialnih medijev. Zagotavljanje takšnih dodanih informacij omogoča več vpogledov v navadno besedilo, ki izhaja iz skrite interpretacije znotraj besedila. Ta prispevek pojasnjuje našo analizo naloge 2, "Večjezična napoved emojev", ki jo je izvedla Semeval-2018. V opravilu so predvideni emoji, ki temelji na delu Twitterjevega besedila, označeni v 20 različnih razredih (najpogosteje uporabljeni emojiji), kjer se ti razredi naučijo in nadaljnje napovedujejo za nevidno Twitterjevo besedilo. V tem delu smo eksperimentirali in analizirali napovedane emojije na podlagi Twitterjevega besedila, kot klasifikacijske težave, pri čemer se emoji obravnavajo kot oznaka za vsak posamezni besedilni podatek. To smo izvedli z uporabo porazdeljene predstavitve besedila prek fastTexta. Prav tako smo si prizadevali prikazati, kako je lahko fastText okvir uporaben v primeru napovedovanja emojijev. Ta naloga je razdeljena na dve podnalogi, temeljita na naboru podatkov, predstavljenih v dveh različnih jezikih angleščina in španščina.', 'ha': "Emoji yana daga 'harshen mafiya ƙaranci' cikin tambuwa-Pop, hususanci a cikin mitandai da jamii kuma yana kasancẽwa ga amfani da shi ya ƙara. Wannan ana amfani da su a koda ta zo da wata daraja wa muhimmada zuwa littattafai, wanda aka poste a kan zanayen mitandai da jamii. Idan ana bãyar da wannan information na ƙara, zai iya ƙaranci ga matsayin mai bayyanãwa, yana da kusa ta sami fassarar da aka ɓõye cikin matsayin. Wannan karatun yana bayyana analyyinmu a kan Taki 2, 'Mulkin Emoji Prediction' da aka yi karatun da Semewal-2018. A cikin aikin, an gane wani emji da aka ƙayyade rubutun Twitter a ƙarƙashin darafõfi 20 dabam (da yawa ake yi amfani da emjis) a inda za'a sanar fasallan su kuma a bayan ka sami zuwa matsayin bakin Twitter. Daga wannan aikin, Mun jarraba da kuma muka yi anayya ga Emjis wanda aka yi bayani a kan rubutun Twitter, kamar wata fitina mai rarraba, inda an gane cewa foji wanda ke samu da shi kamar label ga kowace takardar matsayin. Mun haƙiƙa wannan da Muka yi amfani da misalin littãfin da aka rarraba shi a cikin matsayin kafin. Kayya, Mun yi aikin mu nuna firam masu amfani da matsayi idan an yi wa hisãbi na Emji. Wannan aikin aka raba su cikin task õki biyu, aka ƙayyade su a kan dataset wanda aka bãyar da cikin harshen biyu masu sãɓa cikin Ingiriya da Isbanish.", 'jv': "Emaji kuwi banjur ning 'lengkat luwih' sing gak bukane ning saruluh pop, supoyo karo media sotiki lan ora luwih kuwi mau nggawe kudu kuwi mau. Kasunyatan iki dipulungé kanggo ngelarang sampek luwih dumadhi kanggo nggambar textin, ditambah ing sistem media sotiki. Tulung iso nggawe informasi tambah, iso nggawe luwih nggawe teks sing klok, iso nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno teks. Bu kapulan mudurut saka nggunian sampeyan karo task 2, ' Multilanguage emuji predikion' share dtrequest arah dhéwé tarjamah semeduk-2013. Rasané awakdhéwé, emuji diangkat dhéwé babagatining ujak-ujar pancen YouTube kuwi wis etiket mungkar biasane secara awak dhéwé (lakwatih epokot oleh) awak dhéwé kelas iki diangkat awak dhéwé lan padhiri etiket dhéwé Nang gunggo iki, awake dhéwé éntuk éntuk amplius lan ujaran emuji sing bisa gewasi nggunakake tuwih Tutuk textin, ingkang dipun kesempatan kanggo awake dhéwé éntuk amplius sing bakal terus nggawe layar kanggo mbalkar nggawe data sing sampeyan. text Nambah, awak dhéwé wis gawe nggunian kanggo ngerasakno pakan ngerasakno Text sisara barang kanggo tukang omoji. Perangkat iki bakal mlayu ing pancenenganipun durung, dhéwé wis basa nang dataset sing ngejaraké bingi ingkang karo Spanyola.", 'he': 'האמוג\'י היא אחת מהשפות הגדולה מהר ביותר בתרבות פופ, במיוחד בתקשורת חברתית וזה מאוד לא סביר לשימושו להיפחות. אלה משתמשים בדרך כלל כדי להביא רמה נוספת של משמעות לטקסטים, שפורסמים על פלטפורמות תקשורת חברתית. מציג מידע מווסף כזה, נותן תובנות נוספות לטקסט הפשוט, שמגיעות לפרשנות מוסתרת בתוך הטקסט. העבודה הזו מסבירה את הניתוח שלנו על משימה 2, משימה משותפת של "תחושת אמואי רבה-שפותית" שהובילה על ידי חצי מייל-2018. במשימה, אמוג\'י צפוי מבוסס על חתיכת טקסט טוויטר מוטבע תחת 20 כיסות שונות (אמוג\'ים משתמשים בדרך כלל ביותר) שבו כיסות אלה לומדים ונצפויים נוספים עבור טקסט טוויטר בלתי צפוי. בעבודה הזו, ניסונו ונבחנו את האמוג\'ים שנחזו בהתבסס על טקסט טוויטר, בתור בעיה מסווג שבו האמוג\'י המרכיב נחשב בתווית לכל נתוני טקסט בודד. הפענו את זה באמצעות מייצג מרוחק של טקסט באמצעות טקסט מהיר. בנוסף, עשינו מאמץ כדי להראות כמה מהר מסגרת טקסט יכולה להיות שימושית במקרה של חזיון אמוג\'י. המשימה הזו מתחלקת לשני תושאלות, הן מבוססות על קבוצת נתונים מוצגת בשתי שפות שונות אנגלית וספרדית.', 'bo': "སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ 'འགྱུར་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་' ལས་གཅིག་རེད། ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ར འདི་དག་གི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཡིག་གེ་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ལམ་གླེང་ཐོག འོན་ཀྱང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁ་སྐོང་བྱེད་པ་དང་ཁ་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡིབ་བཞིན་པའི་ཡིག ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་སྒྲུབ་པ་༢་དང་ 'སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་Emoji Prediction' མཉམ་དུ་བསྒྲགས་གནང་། བྱ་འགུལ་ནང་དུ་ཌིས་ཌིར་གྱི་ཡིག་གེ་ཅིག་གི་སྔོན་ཟིན་པའི་emoji་རྣམས་ཟིན་བྲིས་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་ཌིས་ཡིག་གེ་ནང་དུ་ཨ་མོ་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གེ་ལྟར་ཕྱོགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་བཀྲམ་སྟོན་རྩོམ་པ་བེད་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་emoji སྔོན་བསམ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཤར་ཆེན་ཡོད། དེ་དག་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་སྐད་རིགས་སྣང་མེད་པའི་ནང་གི་གན"}
{'en': 'LIS at SemEval-2018 Task 2 : Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ar': 'LIS في SemEval-2018 المهمة 2: مزج Word Embeddings وحقيبة من الميزات للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية متعدد اللغات', 'fr': "LIS au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 2\xa0: Mélanger des intégrations de mots et un sac de fonctionnalités pour la prédiction multilingue d'emoji", 'es': 'LIS en SemEval-2018 Tarea 2: Mezcla de incrustaciones de palabras y conjunto de características para la predicción multilingüe de emojis', 'pt': 'LIS na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 2: Misturando Word Embeddings e Pacote de Recursos para Previsão de Emoji Multilíngue', 'zh': 'LIS在SemEval-2018务2:混词嵌与功,包于多言表情符号占', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のLISタスク2 ：多言語絵文字予測のための単語埋め込みと機能バッグのミックス', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 2 पर LIS: बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी के लिए वर्ड एम्बेडिंग और सुविधाओं का बैग मिश्रण', 'ru': 'LIS на SemEval-2018 Задача 2: Смешивание вложений слов и пакет функций для многоязычного прогнозирования эмодзи', 'ga': 'LIS ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 2: Leabú Focal agus Mála Gnéithe a Mheascadh le haghaidh Réamhaithrise Emoji Ilteangach', 'hu': 'LIS a SemEval-2018 feladat 2: Szóbeágyazások és funkciók táskája keverése a többnyelvű emoji jósláshoz', 'it': 'LIS a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Miscelare incorporazioni di parole e un sacco di funzionalità per la previsione di emoji multilingue', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 2: ανάμειξη ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων και τσάντα χαρακτηριστικών για την πρόβλεψη πολλαπλών γλωσσών', 'lt': 'LIS puslapyje 2018 m. 2 užduotis: maišyti žodžių įdėjimus ir maišelį funkcijų, skirtų daugiakalbei emojų prognozei', 'kk': 'LIS 2 тапсырмасы: Көптілік эмози үшін сөздерді ендіру және көптілік емоциялардың қасиеттерін араластыру', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 2: മിടിക്സിങ്ങ് വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200dക്കും വിശേഷതകള്\u200dക്കുമുള്ള ബേഗ്', 'mt': 'LIS f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 2: It-Taħlita ta’ Inġenji tal-kliem u Borża ta’ Karatteristiċi għat-Tbassir Emoji Multilingwi', 'mn': 'LIS at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'mk': 'LIS на SemEval-2018 задача 2: Мешање на вградувања на зборови и торба со објекти за мултијазична емојска предвидба', 'ms': 'LIS pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Mencampurkan Pencampuran Kata dan beg Ciri-ciri untuk Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa', 'no': 'LIS at semiEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embedding and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'ro': 'LIS la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 2: Amestecarea încorporărilor de cuvinte și punga de caracteristici pentru predicția emoji multilingvă', 'pl': 'LIS na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 2: Mieszanie osadzeń słowa i torby funkcji do wielojęzycznej prognozy emoji', 'sr': 'LIS na semiEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embedding and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'si': 'LIS at HalfEvel-2018 Job 2: Missing Word Embeading and Bag of Featuries for Multilanguage Emotion Precdiction', 'so': 'LIS ka qoran SemEval-2018 Shaqada 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features of Digital Emoji Prediction', 'sv': 'LIS på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 2: Blanda Word Embeddings och väska med funktioner för flerspråkig Emoji Prediction', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 2: பல மொழி எமோயி முன்னுரிமைக்கான கலக்கு வார்த்தை உடைப்புகள் மற்றும் பண்புகளின் பாக்கு', 'ur': 'LIS at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Trình Nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác-thẩm 8: trộn các môi trường từ và Túi đặc trưng cho khai vị đa ngôn ngữ khó học', 'nl': 'LIS op SemEval-2018 Taak 2: Het mengen van woordinsluitingen en zak met functies voor meertalige Emoji voorspelling', 'hr': 'LIS na semiEval-2018 zadatku 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'da': 'LIS på SemEval-2018 Opgave 2: Blanding af Word Embeddings og pose af funktioner til flersprogede Emoji Forudsigelse', 'bg': 'Задача 2: Смесване на словесни вграждания и торба с функции за многоезично прогнозиране на емоджи', 'id': 'LIS di SemEval-2018 Tugas 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'de': 'Aufgabe 2: Mischen von Wort-Einbettungen und Funktionstüten für mehrsprachige Emoji-Vorhersagen', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 2: 혼합 단어 삽입과 다국어 이모티콘 예측 기능 패키지', 'fa': 'LIS در تابع ۲۰۱۸: پیوند کردن کلمات و بسته\u200cی ویژه\u200cهایی برای پیشنهاد Emoji Multilingual', 'tr': 'LIS at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'sw': 'LIS at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'af': 'LIS by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 2: Menger Woord Inbetering en Bag van Funksies vir Multilingual Emoji Voorskou', 'sq': 'LIS në SemEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ২: বহুভাষাভাষী ইমোজি পছন্দের জন্য মিক্সিং ওয়ার্ড এমবেডিং এবং ব্যাগ অফ বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'az': 'LIS at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'hy': 'ԼիՍ-ը 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի 2. հանձնարարությունը. բառերի խառնուրդը և բազմալեզու էմոյի կանխատեսման առանձնահատկությունների պայուսակ', 'bs': 'LIS na semiEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embedding and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'et': 'LIS SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 2: Sõna manustamise ja funktsioonide koti segamine mitmekeelse emoji prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'LIS SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 2: Sanaupotusten ja ominaisuuksien yhdistäminen monikieliseen emojiennusteeseen', 'cs': 'LIS na SemEval-2018 Úkol 2: Míchání slovních vložení a tašky funkcí pro vícejazyčné předpovědi emoji', 'ca': 'LIS a SemEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction', 'jv': 'LIS nang seminval-2013 task 2: Mixing Word embedding and bag of Attributions for Multilanguage emuji predikion', 'sk': 'LIS na SemEval-2018 Naloga 2: Mešanje besednih vdelav in vrečke funkcij za napoved večjezičnih emojijev', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': "LIS ב SemEval-2018 משימה 2: שילוב מילים ומשק של תכונות לטיפול אמואג'י רבולוגי", 'bo': 'LIS at SemEval-2018 Task 2: Mixing Word Embeddings and Bag of Features for Multilingual Emoji Prediction'}
{'en': 'In this paper we present the system submitted to the SemEval2018 task2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Our system approaches both languages as being equal by first ; considering word embeddings associated to automatically computed features of different types, then by applying bagging algorithm RandomForest to predict the emoji of a tweet.', 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos el sistema presentado a la tarea 2 de SemEval2018: Predicción multilingüe de emojis. Nuestro sistema enfoca ambos idiomas como iguales en primer lugar; considerando la incrustación de palabras asociadas a características calculadas automáticamente de diferentes tipos, luego aplicando el algoritmo de embolsado RandomForest para predecir el emoji de un tweet.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث نقدم النظام المقدم إلى مهمة SemEval2018 2: توقع الرموز التعبيرية متعددة اللغات. يتعامل نظامنا مع كلتا اللغتين على أنهما متساويان أولاً ؛ النظر في عمليات دمج الكلمات المرتبطة بالميزات المحسوبة تلقائيًا لأنواع مختلفة ، ثم من خلال تطبيق خوارزمية التعبئة RandomForest للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية للتغريدة.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons le système soumis à la tâche SemEval2018 2\xa0: Prédiction multilingue des emoji. Notre système considère les deux langues comme étant égales d'abord\xa0; en considérant les intégrations de mots associées à des caractéristiques calculées automatiquement de différents types, puis en appliquant l'algorithme d'ensachage RandomForest pour prédire l'emoji d'un tweet.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo apresentamos o sistema submetido à tarefa SemEval20182 : Previsão de emojis multilíngues. Nosso sistema aborda ambas as linguagens como sendo iguais em primeiro lugar; considerando incorporações de palavras associadas a recursos computados automaticamente de diferentes tipos, então aplicando o algoritmo de ensacamento RandomForest para prever o emoji de um tweet.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2018 task 2: Multilingual Emoji Predictionに提出されたシステムを紹介する。私たちのシステムは、まず、異なるタイプの自動計算機能に関連付けられた単語の埋め込みを考慮し、次に、ツイートの絵文字を予測するためにバッギングアルゴリズムRandomForestを適用することによって、両方の言語を等しいものとしてアプローチします。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем систему, представленную для задачи SemEval20182 : Многоязычное прогнозирование эмодзи. Наша система подходит к обоим языкам как к равным, сначала рассматривая вложения слов, связанные с автоматически вычисляемыми функциями различных типов, затем применяя алгоритм рандомного леса, чтобы предсказать эмодзи твита.', 'zh': '本文引SemEval2018务2系统:多言表情符号占。 二语为先;二语为先。 虑与自计异类相关者,然后以bagging算法RandomForest占推文表情符号。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम SemEval2018 task2: बहुभाषी इमोजी भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए प्रस्तुत प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारी प्रणाली दोनों भाषाओं को पहले से समान होने के रूप में देखती है; विभिन्न प्रकार की स्वचालित रूप से गणना की गई सुविधाओं से जुड़े शब्द एम्बेडिंग पर विचार करना, फिर एक ट्वीट के इमोजी की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए बैगिंग एल्गोरिथ्म रैंडमफॉरेस्ट को लागू करके।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair an córas a cuireadh isteach don tasc SemEval20182 : Prediction Emoji Ilteangach. Is ionann ár gcóras agus an dá theanga a bheith comhionann ar dtús; ag smaoineamh ar leabaithe focal a bhaineann le gnéithe de chineálacha éagsúla a ríomhtar go huathoibríoch, ansin trí algartam bagála a chur i bhfeidhm RandomForest chun emoji tweet a thuar.', 'el': "Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε το σύστημα που υποβλήθηκε στην εργασία Πολυγλωσσική πρόβλεψη Εμόζι. Το σύστημά μας προσεγγίζει και τις δύο γλώσσες ως ίσες κατ' αρχήν. Εξετάζοντας τις ενσωματώσεις λέξεων που σχετίζονται με αυτόματα υπολογισμένα χαρακτηριστικά διαφορετικών τύπων, στη συνέχεια εφαρμόζοντας αλγόριθμο σακούλας για να προβλέψει το emoji ενός tweet.", 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენეთ სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval2018 დავამუშავებულია მომუშავებული მომუშავება2 : მრავალენგური Emoji წინასწორება. ჩვენი სისტემა პირველად ორივე ენების განმავლობაში მოთავსდება; სხვა ტიპის ავტომატურად კომპუტირებული ფუნქციებისთვის აღმოჩენა სიტყვების შემდეგ, შემდეგ გადაყენებული ალგორიტიმ RandomForest-ის გამოყენებით, რომ გადაწყენებთ ემოჯების გადაწ', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a SemEval2018 feladathoz benyújtott rendszert: Többnyelvű Emoji Prediction. Rendszerünk mindkét nyelvet egyenlőként közelíti meg először; figyelembe véve a különböző típusú automatikusan kiszámított funkciókhoz kapcsolódó szóbeágyazásokat, majd a RandomForest zsákolási algoritmus alkalmazásával a tweet emojijének előrejelzésére.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo il sistema sottoposto alla task SemEval2018: Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Il nostro sistema affronta entrambe le lingue come uguali per primo; considerando le incorporazioni di parole associate a funzioni calcolate automaticamente di diversi tipi, quindi applicando l'algoritmo di sacking RandomForest per prevedere l'emoji di un tweet.", 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan sistem yang dihantar ke SemEval2018 tugas2 : Prediksi Emoji Berbahasa. Sistem kita mendekati kedua-dua bahasa sebagai sama pada awal; mempertimbangkan penyampaian perkataan yang berkaitan dengan ciri-ciri komputer secara automatik jenis berbeza, kemudian dengan melaksanakan algoritma penyampaian RandomForest untuk meramalkan emoji tweet.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз жүйені SemEval2018 тапсырма2- ға жіберілген: көптілік эмози бағдарламасы. Біздің жүйеміз біріншіден тең тілдерге барады. Бірнеше түрлерге автоматты түрде есептелген мүмкіндіктерге сәйкес келетін сөздерді ендіруді қарастырып, содан кейін tweet көмегін алгоритмді таңдау үшін RandomForest алгоритмін қолдану ү', 'mk': 'In this paper we present the system submitted to the SemEval2018 task2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  Нашиот систем се приближува до двата јазици како да се еднакви до прво; разгледувајќи ги зборовите поврзани со автоматски компјутирани карактеристики на различни типови, потоа применувајќи го алгоритмот за пакување RandomForest за да се предвидат емоџите на Твитер.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome sistemą, pateiktą SemEval2018 užduotiui2 : Daugiakalbis Emoji prognozė. Mūsų sistema pirmiausia vertina abi kalbas kaip lygias; svarstyti žodžių įdėjimus, susijusius su automatiškai apskaičiuotomis skirtingų tipų savybėmis, tada taikant įdėjimo algoritmą RandomForest, kad būtų galima prognozuoti tweeto emodžius.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi systemet som er sendt til semiEval2018-oppgåve2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Sistemet vårt nærmer begge språk som først er lik. Sjå etter at ordinnbygginga er tilknytta til automatisk rekna ut funksjonar av ulike typar, så ved å bruka bageringsalgoritme RandomForest for å foregå emoji på ein tweet.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид системийг SemEval2018 даалгавраа2-д тайлбарлаж байна: олон хэлний Emoji даалгавраа. Бидний систем хоёр хэл нь эхлээд тэнцүү байх болно. Өөр төрлийн тооцоолж буй хэлбэртэй холбогдолтой үг бичлэгүүдийг ойлгоход, дараа нь бичлэгийн эможийг таамаглах зорилготой RandomForest алгоритмын алгоритмыг ашиглаж байна.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d2018 ടാസ്ക്ക് കൊടുക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം കാണിക്കുന്നു: നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം ആദ്യം സമമായി രണ്ടു ഭാഷകളെ സമീപിക്കുന്നു; വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ സ്വയമായി കണക്കാക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy system zgłoszony do zadania SemEval2018: Wielojęzyczna prognoza Emoji. Nasz system najpierw podchodzi do obu języków jako równych; Rozważając osadzenia słów związane z automatycznie obliczanymi funkcjami różnych typów, następnie poprzez zastosowanie algorytmu bagging RandomForest w celu przewidzenia emoji tweeta.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm sistemul prezentat la sarcina SemEval20182: Predicția emoțiilor multilingve. Sistemul nostru abordează ambele limbi ca fiind egal la început; luând în considerare încorporările de cuvinte asociate caracteristicilor calculate automat de diferite tipuri, apoi aplicând algoritmul de pungere RandomForest pentru a prezice emoji-ul unui tweet.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument qed nippreżentaw is-sistema ppreżentata lill-kompitu SemEval2018: Predizzjoni Emoji Multilingwi. Is-sistema tagħna tilħaq iż-żewġ lingwi bħala ugwali mill-ewwel; considering word embeddings associated to automatically computed features of different types, then by applying bagging algorithm RandomForest to predict the emoji of a tweet.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi systemet som skickats in till SemEval2018 uppgift2: Flerspråkig Emoji Prediction. Vårt system närmar sig båda språken som likvärdiga först; överväga ordinbäddningar associerade med automatiskt beräknade funktioner av olika typer, sedan genom att tillämpa påsningsalgoritmen RandomForest för att förutsäga emoji i en tweet.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem podignut semiEval2018 zadatku2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Naš sistem se približava obje jezike kao prvi; S obzirom na ugrađenje riječi povezano sa automatskim računalnim karakteristikama različitih vrsta, onda primjenjivanjem algoritma za vrećivanje RandomForest da predvidi emoji tweet a.', 'ta': 'In this paper we present the system submitted to the SemEval2018 task2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction.  எங்கள் கணினி முதலில் சமமாக இரு மொழிகளை நெருங்குகிறது; வேறு வகைகளின் தன்னியக்கமாக கணக்கிடப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, பின்னர் தொகுப்பு அல்குறிப்பிட்ட காட்டை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு தொடர்ப', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පද්ධතිය සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩ2ට පිළිගත්තා විදිහට පිළිගත්තා විදිහට පිළිගත්තා. අපේ පද්ධතිය දෙන්නම් භාෂාවට පළමුවෙන් සමාන වෙන්න පුළුවන්; වෙනස් වර්ගයක් ගැන ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්න, ඊට පස්සේ බැග් ඇල්ග', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa nidaamka loo soo dhiibay shaqada SemEval2018: Heeganka luuqadaha badan ee Emoji. Our system approaches both languages as being equal by first;  ka fiirsashada warqadaha la xidhiidhiyey oo ku saabsan isticmaalka noocyada kala duduwan, kadibna lagu codsashada jardiinada jardiinada ee RandomForest si uu u sii sheego emoji Tweet ah.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں سیسٹم کو SemEval2018 ٹاکسٹ ۲ میں پیش کیا گیا ہے: Multilingual Emoji Prediction. ہمارا سیستم پہلے ہی دونوں زبانوں کے پاس پہنچتا ہے۔ کلمات ابڈینگ کو اپنے ساتھ کامپیوتر کی مختلف طریقوں کے خصوصے کے ساتھ متصل کیا گیا ہے، پھر ایک ٹویٹ کے emoji کو پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے بغنگ الگوریتم RandomForest کے ذریعہ استعمال کر رہا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda SemEval2018 tashkilotlariga joʻnatilgan tizimni 2: Multi-tillar Emoji Diqqat. Bizning tizimmiz birinchi tillarga teng bo'lishga ikkita tilga qarang; Bu so'zlarni avtomatik boshqa turlar bilan bog'liqlangan so'zlarni tasavvur qilish va keyin Twitterdan emoji hisoblash uchun algorithm orqali qo'llash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu hệ thống được gửi đến nhiệm vụ SemEvariC8: đa ngôn ngữ tấn công Emoji. Trước tiên, hệ thống của chúng ta xem hai ngôn ngữ như bình đẳng; xem xét sự nhúng từ tương ứng với các tính năng tự động của các loại khác nhau, sau đó bằng cách sử dụng thuật to án túi tìm được ngẫu nhiên khu rừng để dự đoán biểu tượng của tweet.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we het systeem dat is ingediend bij de SemEval2018 taak2: Meertalige Emoji Voorspelling. Ons systeem benadert beide talen eerst als gelijk; Overweeg woordinsluitingen geassocieerd met automatisch berekende functies van verschillende typen, dan door het bagging algoritme RandomForest toe te passen om de emoji van een tweet te voorspellen.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме системата, подадена на задача Многоезична прогноза за емоджи. Нашата система подхожда към двата езика като равни на първо място; като се има предвид вграждането на думи, свързани с автоматично изчислени функции от различни типове, след това чрез прилагане на алгоритъм за опаковане за предсказване на емоджи на туит.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem podignut zadatku SemEval2018-2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction . Naš sustav se približava obje jezike kao prvi; s obzirom na uključenje riječi povezane s automatskim izračunatim karakteristikama različitih vrsta, zatim primjenjivanjem algoritma kockanja RandomForest za predviđanje emoji tweet a.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir das System vor, das der SemEval2018 Task2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction vorgelegt wurde. Unser System betrachtet beide Sprachen zunächst als gleich; Berücksichtigung von Worteinbettungen, die mit automatisch berechneten Merkmalen verschiedener Typen verknüpft sind, dann durch Anwendung des Bagging-Algorithmus RandomForest, um das Emoji eines Tweets vorherzusagen.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami mempersembahkan sistem yang dikirim ke SemEval2018 task2: Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Sistem kita mendekati kedua bahasa sebagai sama pada awalnya; mempertimbangkan pembangunan kata yang berhubungan dengan karakteristik komputer otomatis dari jenis yang berbeda, kemudian dengan menggunakan algoritma pembangunan RandomForest untuk memprediksi emoji dari tweet.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ سیستم را به وظیفه SemEval2018 معرفی می کنیم: پیشنهاد Emoji Multilingual. سیستم ما به هر دو زبان به عنوان اول یکسان نزدیک می شود. با توجه به انجمن کلمات ارتباط به ویژه\u200cهای خودکار محاسبه شده از نوع\u200cهای مختلف، سپس با استفاده از الگوریتم بسته\u200cگریتم RandomForest برای پیش\u200cبینی از ایموجی\u200cهای یک تویت.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는SemEval 2018 퀘스트 2: 다국어 표정 예측에 제출한 시스템을 소개했다.우리의 시스템은 먼저 두 언어를 평등하게 여긴다.자동 계산의 다양한 유형의 특징과 관련된 단어 삽입을 고려한 뒤 베이킹 알고리즘인 랜덤포레스트를 적용해 트위터의 표정을 예측한다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunailetea mfumo uliotolewa kwenye kazi za SemEval2018 : Utawala wa lugha nyingi wa Emoji. Mfumo wetu unakaribia lugha zote kama vile ni sawa kwanza; considering word embeddings associated to automatically computed features of different types, then by applying bagging algorithm RandomForest to predict the emoji of a tweet.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi systemet indsendt til SemEval2018 opgaven2: Flersproget Emoji Forudsigelse. Vores system nærmer sig begge sprog som værende lige i første omgang; overveje ordindlejringer, der er knyttet til automatisk beregnede funktioner af forskellige typer, derefter ved at anvende sækkealgoritme RandomForest til at forudsige emoji af en tweet.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda sistemi SemEval2018 zady2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction ugradyldy. Biziň sistemimiz ilkinji gezek hem dillere eşit ýaly gollaýar; Aýratyn hasaplanýan hiller üçin söz integrasyny öz-özüne alyp geçirilýän diýip pikir edýän, soňra tweetin emoji üýtgetmek üçin baglanmak algoritmini RANDOM Oturgyç ullanýar.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም የSemEval2018 ስርዓት ላይ የሰጠውን ስርዓት እናቀርባለን ፡ - የብዙ ቋንቋዎች ኢዮጂ መግለጫ፡፡ ስርዓታችን በሁለቱ ቋንቋዎች በመጀመሪያ እንደሚተካከሉ ይደርሳል፤ የንግግር ግንኙነት በተለየ የልዩ ዓይነቶች አካባቢዎች በተመለከተ ጊዜ፣ በዚያን ጊዜ የሀገር አልጎሪም ዱር በመጠቀም የTweet ኢሞጂን ለመቀበል በመጠቀም በመጠቀም ነው፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie papier voorsien ons die stelsel aan die SemEval2018 taak2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Ons stelsel naby beide tale as gelyk is deur eerste; onderwerp word inbêding wat met outomaties bereken funksies van verskillende tipes geassosieer word, dan deur die bageringsalgoritme RandomForest toepassing te doen om die emoji van 'n tweet te voorskou.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք համակարգը, որը ներկայացվել է 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" առաջադրանքի2. Մեր համակարգը մոտենում է երկու լեզուներին որպես հավասար: հաշվի առնելով բառերի ներգրավումները, որոնք կապված են տարբեր տեսակների ավտոմատ հաշվարկվող հատկանիշների հետ, հետո օգտագործելով բաժանելու ալգորիթմը "Պատահական Forest", որպեսզի կանխատեսենք թվիթի էմոջին:', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne paraqesim sistemin e paraqitur në detyrën SemEval2018: Sistemi ynë i afrohet të dy gjuhëve si të jenë të barabarta në fillim; duke konsideruar përfshirjet e fjalëve të lidhura me karakteristikat automatike të llojeve të ndryshme, pastaj duke aplikuar algoritmin e qesjes RandomForest për të parashikuar emoji të një tweet.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem podignut semiEval2018 zadatku2 : Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Naš sistem se približava obje jezike kao prvi; S obzirom na ugrađenje riječi povezano sa automatskim izračunalnim karakteristikama različitih vrsta, onda primjenjivanjem algoritma za bagiranje RandomForest da predvidi emoji tweet a.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সেমইভাল২০১৮ কাজের কাছে প্রদান করা সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করছি: বহুভাষাভাষী এমোজি প্রেশন। আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রথমে একই রকম ভাষার কাছে পৌঁছায়; স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিভিন্ন ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর সাথে যোগাযোগী শব্দের বিষয়গুলো বিবেচনা করে, তারপর ব্যাগিং অ্যালগরিদম র্যান্ডোমো', 'ca': "En aquest paper presentem el sistema submetit a la tasca SemEval2018: Our system approaches both languages as being equal by first;  considerant les integracions de paraules associades a característiques computades automàticament de diferents tipus, després aplicant l'algoritme de bagage RandomForest per predir l'emoji d'un tweet.", 'az': 'Bu kağıtda SemEval2018 task2-ə göndərilmiş sistemi göstəririk: çoxlu dil Emoji Prediction. Sistemimiz hər iki dilə ilk dəfə eyni ola bilər. Tövidlərin emoji öyüd-nəsihətlərini öyrənmək üçün "RandomForest" algorismu istifadə edərək, öz-özündən hesaplanmış fərqli növlərin əlaqələrinə bağlı söz içərilərini düşünərək.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitame süsteemi, mis on esitatud SemEval2018 ülesande2: mitmekeelse emoji prognoos. Meie süsteem läheneb mõlemale keelele kui võrdsetele kõigepealt; Võttes arvesse erinevat tüüpi automaatselt arvutatavate funktsioonidega seotud sõnade manustamist, rakendades seejärel pakkimisalgoritmi RandomForest, et ennustada säutsu emojid.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme systém předložený k úkolu SemEval2018: Multilingual Emoji Prediction. Náš systém přistupuje k obou jazykům jako k rovnosti. Zvažujeme vkládání slov spojené s automaticky vypočítanými vlastnostmi různých typů, pak použitím algoritmu sáčkování RandomForest k předpovědi emoji tweetu.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme SemEval2018 tehtävään lähetettyä järjestelmää: Monikielinen Emoji Ennuste. Järjestelmämme lähestyy molempia kieliä aluksi tasavertaisina; Kun otetaan huomioon eri tyyppisiin automaattisesti lasketuihin ominaisuuksiin liittyvät sanaupotukset, käytetään pussitusalgoritmia RandomForest ennustamaan tweetin emojia.', 'jv': 'Nan pepul iki kita nggawe sistem sing nyebutakne ning semebal2020 task2: Multilanguage emuji predikion. Sistem-sistem sing ditambah tanggal sing sampeyan mruput; iki politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predstavljamo sistem, predložen v nalogo SemEval2018: Večjezična napoved emojev. Naš sistem približuje obema jezikoma, kot da sta najprej enaka; upoštevajte vdelave besed, povezane s samodejno izračunanimi funkcijami različnih tipov, nato z uporabo algoritma za vrečanje RandomForest za napoved emojija tweeta.', 'ha': "@ action NafuyinMu na kusantar da zimanmu biyu kamar da suka zama daidai a farkon; ka kula da filin da aka haɗa da shi farat ɗaya masu tsari na wasu nau'i daban, sa'an nan da za'a yi amfani da zane algoritm RanDomwood dõmin ya yi bayani ga hisorin na wani na'ura.", 'he': "בעיתון הזה אנחנו מציגים את המערכת שנשלחה למשימה SemEval2018 המערכת שלנו מתקרבת לשני השפות כשווה בהתחלה; בהתחשב בתכניות מילים הקשורות לאיכויים מחשבים אוטומטיים של סוגים שונים, ואז על ידי שימוש באלגוריתם של תיקים RandomForest כדי לחזות את האמוג'י של טוויט.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དུས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་པ་དེ་རིང་༢༠༨་ལོའི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ཨ་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དང་པོ་དང་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡིན་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཛུལ་ཡོད། རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྩིས་བཏང་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཐོག་ལས་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་གནས་ཚུལ་དག་ལ་བསམ་བཞིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'ALANIS at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : A Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'ar': 'ALANIS في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: نهج هندسي مميز لاكتشاف السخرية في التغريدات الإنجليزية', 'fr': "ALANIS au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 3\xa0: Une approche d'ingénierie des fonctionnalités pour la détection de l'ironie en anglais", 'es': 'ALANIS en SemEVAL-2018 Tarea 3: Un enfoque de ingeniería de artículos para la detección de ironía en tuits en inglés', 'pt': 'ALANIS no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Uma Abordagem de Engenharia de Recursos para Detecção de Ironia em Tweets em Inglês', 'ja': 'ALANIS at SemEval -2018 Task 3: A Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'zh': 'ALANIS在SemEval-2018务3:英语推讽刺性检之法', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर ALANIS: अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए एक फीचर इंजीनियरिंग दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'АЛАНИС на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Инженерный подход к обнаружению иронии в твитах на английском языке', 'ga': 'ALANIS ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Cur Chuige Gné-Innealtóireachta maidir le Brath na híoróine i Tweets Béarla', 'ka': 'ALANIS სამუშაო-2018 სამუშაო სამუშაო: სამუშაო ინგენერიო ინგენერიო დახმარება ინგენერიონის განსახულებაში', 'hu': 'ALANIS a SemEval-2018 3. feladatán: Az irónia felismerésének funkciómérnöki megközelítése angol tweetekben', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Μια προσέγγιση μηχανικής χαρακτηριστικών στην ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα Αγγλικά Τουίτερ', 'it': "ALANIS al SemEval-2018 Task 3: Un approccio ingegneristico alla rilevazione dell'ironia in inglese Tweet", 'mk': 'АЛАНИС на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Инженерски пристап до идентификација на иронија на англиски твитови', 'lt': 'ALANIS „SemEval-2018“ 3 užduotis: Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'ms': 'ALANIS di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: A Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'kk': 'ALANIS 3. тапсырма: Ағылшын tweets тізімінде Ирония тапсырмасының қасиеттері', 'mt': 'ALANIS f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 3: Approċċ ta’ Inġinerija b’Karatteristiċi għad-Detezzjoni tal-Ironja fit-Tweets Ingliżi', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3: ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിലേക്ക് ഒരു പ്രത്യേക എഞ്ചിനീയറിങ്ങിന്\u200d', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'no': 'ALANIS på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Eit funksjonsEngineering approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'ro': 'ALANIS la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: O abordare de inginerie a caracteristicilor pentru detectarea ironiei în limba engleză Tweets', 'sr': 'ALANIS na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Pristup za in ženjerski pristup Ironiji u engleskim tweetima', 'si': 'ALANIS at semeval-2018 Job 3: A Featuration Engineering approach to Ironic Detection in English Tweets', 'pl': 'ALANIS na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Podejście inżynierii funkcji do wykrywania ironii w angielskich tweetach', 'ur': 'آلنیس سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 3: انگلیسی ٹویٹ میں ایک فکرت انجینریسی کی تقریبا', 'so': 'ALANIS ee Shaqada 3:', 'sv': 'ALANIS på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Ett funktionstekniskt tillvägagångssätt för att upptäcka ironi i engelska tweets', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் அலானிஸ்: ஒரு சிறப்பு பொறியியல் ஈரின் கண்டுபிடிப்பை ஆங்கிலத்தில் தேர்ந்தெடுக்க செல்கிறது', 'uz': '3. Vazifani SemEval- 2018- yilda ALANIS: Inglizcha Twitterlar bilan Isyon Qidirish uchun foydalanish', 'vi': 'ALANS tại SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 3: A Feature Engineering tiếp cận tới trinh sát phòng luyện sắt bằng tiếng Anh Tweet', 'hr': 'ALANIS na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Pristup za in ženjerski pristup Ironiji u engleskim tweetima', 'nl': 'ALANIS op SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Een feature engineering benadering van ironie detectie in Engelse Tweets', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Характеристикен инженерен подход към откриването на ирония в английски Туитс', 'da': 'ALANIS på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: En funktionsteknisk tilgang til sporing af ironi på engelske tweets', 'de': 'ALANIS auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Ein Feature Engineering Ansatz zur Ironie Detection in englischen Tweets', 'ko': 'ALANIS가SemEval-18 작업3: 영어 트윗에서 역설적으로 검출하는 특징 공학 방법', 'fa': 'آلنیس در ماموریت سوم Eval-2018: یک مهندسی مهندسی ویژه به کشف آهنی در تویت انگلیسی', 'id': 'ALANIS di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: A Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'sw': 'ALANIS kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Uhandisi wa Tamko wa Utafiti wa Uelelezi kwa Twita za Kiingereza', 'tr': 'ALANIS at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'sq': 'ALANIS në SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'af': "ALANIS by SemEval-2018 Taak 3: 'n Funksie Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets", 'am': 'የስምEval-2018 ስራ 3: በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች ላይ የፍቱር ኢንጂንጂንጂል የኢሮኒ ምርመራ ላይ', 'hy': 'ԱԼԱՆԻՍ-ը 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ"-ի 3. հանձնարարությունը. Անգլերենի թվիթերում գտնվող "Անգլերենի ճարտարագիտական մոտեցում"', 'az': 'ALANIS: İngilizə Tweets içində İroni Keşfetməsi üçün İroni Mühendisi Yaxınlaşması', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩: ইংরেজী টুইটারে একটি বিশেষ প্রকৌশলী ইঞ্জিনিয়ারিং যাওয়ার পথ', 'bs': 'ALANIS na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Pristup in ženjerskog inženjerstva za detekciju Ironije na engleskim tweetima', 'ca': 'ALANIS a SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection on English Tweets', 'cs': 'ALANIS na SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Feature Engineering přístup k detekci ironie v anglických tweetech', 'et': 'ALANIS SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 3: Funktsioonitehniline lähenemine iroonia tuvastamisele inglise keeles Tweets', 'fi': 'ALANIS SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'jv': 'AlANIN nang seminval-2008 task 3: A Attribution Ingenierji Method to irny detection in englesi', 'sk': 'ALANIS na SemEval-2018 Naloga 3: Pristop inženiringa funkcij k odkrivanju ironije v angleščini Tweets', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase', 'bo': 'ALANIS at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Feature Engineering Approach to Irony Detection in English Tweets', 'he': 'משימה 3: גישה מהנדסה טבעית לגילוי אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the ALANIS system that participated in Task 3 of SemEval-2018. We develop a system for detection of irony, as well as the detection of three types of irony : verbal polar irony, other verbal irony, and situational irony. The system uses a logistic regression model in subtask A and a voted classifier system with manually developed features to identify ironic tweets. This model improves on a naive bayes baseline by about 8 percent on training set.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام ALANIS الذي شارك في المهمة 3 من SemEval-2018. نقوم بتطوير نظام للكشف عن السخرية ، وكذلك الكشف عن ثلاثة أنواع من السخرية: المفارقة القطبية اللفظية ، والسخرية اللفظية الأخرى ، والسخرية الظرفية. يستخدم النظام نموذج الانحدار اللوجستي في المهمة الفرعية A ونظام تصنيف الأصوات مع ميزات مطورة يدويًا لتحديد التغريدات الساخرة. يتحسن هذا النموذج على خط أساس بايز ساذج بحوالي 8 بالمائة في مجموعة التدريب.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema ALANIS que participou da Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2018. Desenvolvemos um sistema de detecção de ironia, bem como a detecção de três tipos de ironia: ironia polar verbal, outra ironia verbal e ironia situacional. O sistema utiliza um modelo de regressão logística na subtarefa A e um sistema classificador votado com recursos desenvolvidos manualmente para identificar tweets irônicos. Esse modelo melhora em uma linha de base ingênua em cerca de 8% no conjunto de treinamento.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système ALANIS qui a participé à la tâche 3 de SemeVAL-2018. Nous développons un système de détection de l'ironie, ainsi que la détection de trois types d'ironie\xa0: l'ironie polaire verbale, l'autre ironie verbale et l'ironie situationnelle. Le système utilise un modèle de régression logistique dans la sous-tâche A et un système de classification voté avec des fonctionnalités développées manuellement pour identifier les tweets ironiques. Ce modèle améliore une base bayésienne naïve d'environ 8 pour cent sur un ensemble d'entraînement.", 'es': 'Este documento describe el sistema ALANIS que participó en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018. Desarrollamos un sistema para la detección de la ironía, así como la detección de tres tipos de ironía: ironía polar verbal, otra ironía verbal e ironía situacional. El sistema utiliza un modelo de regresión logística en la subtarea A y un sistema clasificador votado con funciones desarrolladas manualmente para identificar tuits irónicos. Este modelo mejora en una línea de base bayes ingenua en aproximadamente un 8 por ciento en el conjunto de entrenamiento.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018のTask 3に参加したAlanisシステムについて述べる。私たちは、皮肉を検出するためのシステムを開発し、言葉の極性皮肉、その他の言葉の皮肉、状況の皮肉の3種類の皮肉を検出します。このシステムは、サブタスクAにおけるロジスティック回帰モデルと、皮肉なツイートを識別するために手動で開発された機能を有する投票分類システムとを使用する。このモデルは、ナイーブベイズベースラインで、トレーニングセットで約8パーセント改善します。', 'zh': '本文述预SemEval-2018务3ALANIS统。 发一检之统,及三刺:极地刺,他刺情。 统于子职A用逻辑归模,而用手动发功能之投票分类器以识刺意之推文。 其训练集上素贝叶斯基线上增约 8%。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर ALANIS सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जिसने SemEval-2018 के कार्य 3 में भाग लिया था। हम विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए एक प्रणाली विकसित करते हैं, साथ ही साथ तीन प्रकार की विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए: मौखिक ध्रुवीय विडंबना, अन्य मौखिक विडंबना, और स्थितिजन्य विडंबना। सिस्टम सबटास्क ए में एक लॉजिस्टिक प्रतिगमन मॉडल और विडंबनात्मक ट्वीट्स की पहचान करने के लिए मैन्युअल रूप से विकसित सुविधाओं के साथ एक वोट क्लासिफायर सिस्टम का उपयोग करता है। इस मॉडल के बारे में प्रशिक्षण सेट पर 8 प्रतिशत से एक भोले bayes आधार रेखा पर सुधार करता है.', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе описывается система ALANIS, которая участвовала в Задаче 3 SemEval-2018. Мы разрабатываем систему обнаружения иронии, а также обнаружения трех видов иронии: словесной полярной иронии, другой словесной иронии и ситуационной иронии. Система использует модель логистической регрессии в подзадаче A и систему классификаторов с голосованием с разработанными вручную функциями для идентификации иронических твитов. Эта модель улучшается на исходном уровне наивных байесов примерно на 8 процентов на тренировочном наборе.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras ALANIS a ghlac páirt i dTasc 3 de SemEval-2018. Déanaimid forbairt ar chóras chun an íoróin a bhrath, chomh maith le trí chineál íoróin a bhrath: íoróin pholar bhriathartha, íoróin bhriathartha eile, agus íoróin staide. Úsáideann an córas samhail aischéimniúcháin lóistíochta i bhfothasc A agus córas aicmitheora vótáilte le gnéithe a fhorbraítear de láimh chun tweetanna íorónta a aithint. Feabhsaítear an tsamhail seo ar bhunlíne naive bayes de thart ar 8 faoin gcéad ar thacar oiliúna.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერა ALANIS სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval-2018 სამუშაო სამუშაო დაწყებულია. ჩვენ იპონიის განახლებისთვის სისტემის განახლებას და სამი ტიპის იპონიის განახლებას: გერბალური პოლური იპონია, სხვა გერბალური იპონია და სიტაციალური იპონია. Name ეს მოდელი ნაირი ბეიზების ფესური ხაზში 8 პროცენტის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისია.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα ΑΛΑΝΗΣ που συμμετείχε στο έργο 3 του SemEval-2018. Αναπτύσσουμε ένα σύστημα για την ανίχνευση της ειρωνείας, καθώς και για την ανίχνευση τριών τύπων ειρωνείας: λεκτική πολική ειρωνεία, άλλη λεκτική ειρωνεία και καταστατική ειρωνεία. Το σύστημα χρησιμοποιεί ένα μοντέλο λογιστικής παλινδρόμησης στην υποταγή Α και ένα ψηφισμένο σύστημα ταξινόμησης με μη αυτόματο τρόπο αναπτυγμένα χαρακτηριστικά για τον προσδιορισμό ειρωνικών tweets. Αυτό το μοντέλο βελτιώνεται σε μια αφελής βάση κατά περίπου 8 τοις εκατό στο σετ προπόνησης.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 3. feladatában részt vevő ALANIS rendszert. Kifejlesztünk egy rendszert az irónia felismerésére, valamint három típusú irónia felismerésére: verbális poláris irónia, egyéb verbális irónia és helyzeti irónia. A rendszer logisztikai regressziós modellt használ az A részfeladatban és egy szavazott osztályozó rendszert használ manuálisan fejlesztett funkciókkal az ironikus tweetek azonosítására. Ez a modell körülbelül 8 százalékkal javul a naiv bayes alapkészleten.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma ALANIS sistema, kuri dalyvavo 2013 m. pusmečio vertinimo 3 užduotyje. Mes sukuriame ironijos aptikimo sistemą, taip pat trijų rūšių ironijos aptikimą: žodinę poliarinę ironiją, kitą žodinę ironiją ir situacinę ironiją. Sistema A pakopoje naudoja logistinį regresijos model į ir balsuotą klasifikavimo sistemą su rankiniu būdu sukurtomis savybėmis ironiniams tweetams nustatyti. Šis modelis, prieš pradedant gydyti anksčiau negydytais įlankais, gerėja maždaug 8 proc. mokymo grupėje.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema ALANIS che ha partecipato al Task 3 di SemEval-2018. Sviluppiamo un sistema per la rilevazione dell'ironia, così come la rilevazione di tre tipi di ironia: l'ironia polare verbale, l'altra ironia verbale e l'ironia situazionale. Il sistema utilizza un modello di regressione logistica nella sottomissione A e un sistema di classificazione votato con funzionalità sviluppate manualmente per identificare tweet ironici. Questo modello migliora su una base naive bayes di circa l'8% sul set di allenamento.", 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот ALANIS кој учествуваше во задачата 3 на SemEval-2018. Развиваме систем за детекција на иронија, како и детекција на три видови иронија: вербална поларна иронија, друга вербална иронија и ситуационална иронија. Системот користи логистички регресен модел во подпрашањето А и гласан класификатор систем со рачно развиени карактеристики за идентификување иронички твитови. Овој модел се подобрува на базата на наивните бајови за околу 8 проценти од тренингот.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 3- тапсырмасында қатысу үшін бір-біріне қатысу үшін ALANIS жүйесін анықтайды. Иронияны анықтау жүйесін жасаймыз, және үш түрлі иронияны анықтау жүйесін жасаймыз: вербалды поляр ирониясы, басқа вербалды ирониясы және жағдайлы ирониясы. Жүйелік A суретінде логистикалық регрессия үлгісін және қолмен жасалған құрылғыларды анықтау үшін қолданатын классификатор жүйесінде қолданады. Бұл үлгі бақылау кезінде 8 пайызы бойынша наивды бақылау кезінде жасайды.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 3 ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന അലാനിസ് സിസ്റ്റമാണ്. പരിഹസിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു, മൂന്നു തരം തമാശയുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതും: സാധാരണ പോളിര്\u200d പരിഹാസം, മറ്റൊര ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ലോഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് റിക്രഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d വോട്ട് ചെയ് പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ സെറ്റില്\u200d ഏകദേശം 8 ശതമാനം മാത്രമാണ് ഈ മോഡല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-2018 оны 3-р ажил дээр оролцсон ALANIS системийг тайлбарладаг. Бид аймшигтай байдлыг олох системийг бүтээж, гурван төрлийн аймшигтай байдлыг олох системийг бүтээж байна: үгийн галзуу галзуу, бусад үгийн галзуу, нөхцөл байдлын галзуу. Эдгээр систем нь A-ын доогуур суралцахын тулд логист регрессийн загварыг ашигладаг. Сайн сонголтын хуваалцагчийн системийг гараар хөгжүүлсэн бөгөөд гайхалтай tweets тодорхойлж чадна. Энэ загвар нь сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын 8 хувь дээр сайн байдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver ALANIS-systemet som delta i oppgåve 3 av semiEval-2018. Vi utviklar eit system for oppdaging av irony, og oppdaging av tre typar irony: verbal polar irony, andre verbal irony og situasjonell irony. Systemet brukar ein logistisk regresjonsmodul i underspørjinga A og eit stemte klassifiseringssystem med manuelt utvikla funksjonar for å identifisera ironiske tweeter. Denne modellen forbetrar på ein naive baseline med omtrent 8 prosent på opplæringssettet.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano system ALANIS, który uczestniczył w zadaniu 3 SemEval-2018. Opracowujemy system wykrywania ironii, a także wykrywania trzech rodzajów ironii: werbalnej ironii polarnej, innej werbalnej ironii oraz ironii sytuacyjnej. System wykorzystuje model regresji logistycznej w podzadaniu A oraz system klasyfikacji głosowanej z ręcznie opracowanymi funkcjami identyfikacji ironicznych tweetów. Model ten poprawia naiwną bayes bayes o około 8 procent na zestawie treningowym.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul ALANIS care a participat la Activitatea 3 a SemEval-2018. Dezvoltăm un sistem pentru detectarea ironiei, precum și detectarea a trei tipuri de ironie: ironia polară verbală, alta ironie verbală și ironia situațională. Sistemul folosește un model de regresie logistică în subsarcina A și un sistem de clasificare votat cu caracteristici dezvoltate manual pentru a identifica tweeturile ironice. Acest model se îmbunătățește pe o bază naivă bayes cu aproximativ 8% pe setul de antrenament.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem ALANIS koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 3 od semiEvala-2018. Razvijamo sistem za otkrivanje ironija, kao i otkrivanje tri vrste ironija: verbalna polarna ironija, druga verbalna ironija i situacionalna ironija. Sistem koristi model logističke regresije u podpitanju A i glasački klasifikatorski sistem sa ručno razvijenim karakteristikama za identifikaciju ironičkih tweeta. Ovaj model se poboljšava na naivnoj bazi na osnovnoj liniji za oko 8 posto na setu obuke.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩේ තුන්වෙනි කාර්යාලයේ සම්බන්ධ වැඩේ අලානිස් පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා. අපි අයිරෝනියක් හොයාගන්න පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා, ඒවගේම අයිරෝනියක් තුන් වර්ගයක් හොයාගන්න: ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිකාරය Name මේ මොඩල් එක නියම බේස් බේස් ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් වැඩ කරනවා ප්\u200dරධාන සැටීමේ 8% ගැන.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem ALANIS yang berpartisipasi dalam Tugas 3 SemEval-2018. Kami mengembangkan sistem untuk pengesan ironi, dan pengesan tiga jenis ironi: ironi polar verbal, ironi verbal lain, dan ironi situasi. Sistem menggunakan model regresi logistik dalam subtask A dan sistem pengelasah yang dipilih dengan ciri-ciri yang dikembangkan secara manual untuk mengenalpasti tweet ironik. Model ini meningkat pada dasar bayes naif dengan kira-kira 8 peratus pada set latihan.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema ALANIS li pparteċipat fil-Kompitu 3 tas-SemEval-2018. Aħna niżviluppaw sistema għall-iskoperta tal-ironija, kif ukoll l-iskoperta ta’ tliet tipi ta’ ironija: ironija polari verbali, ironija verbali oħra, u ironija tas-sitwazzjoni. Is-sistema tuża mudell ta’ rigressjoni loġistika fis-sottomistoqsija A u sistema ta’ klassifikatur ivvutat b’karatteristiċi żviluppati manwalment biex tidentifika tweets ironiċi. Dan il-mudell itejjeb fil-linja bażi tal-baħar naïve b’madwar 8 fil-mija fuq is-sett ta’ taħriġ.', 'so': 'This paper describes the ALANIS system that participated in Task 3 of SemEval-2018.  Waxaynu horumarinnaa nidaam la soo ogaanayo iroqo iyo garashada sadex nooc oo jiirka ah: ironiska hareerada ah, iroiro kale oo af-ka ah iyo xaalad xaalad ah. Isticmaalku wuxuu ku isticmaalaa model jimicsi ah oo ku qoran subtashka A iyo nidaam af-qoraal ah oo qof u qoray si uu u caddeeyo tweetka ironicka. Tusaaladan wuxuu ku korodaa baalasha nainaive ah qiyaastii 8 boqolkiiba oo ku qoran tababarka waxbarashada.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver ALANIS-systemet som deltog i uppgift 3 i SemEval-2018. Vi utvecklar ett system för detektering av ironi, samt detektering av tre typer av ironi: verbal polär ironi, annan verbal ironi och situationsironi. Systemet använder en logistisk regressionsmodell i subaktivitet A och ett röstat klassificeringssystem med manuellt utvecklade funktioner för att identifiera ironiska tweets. Denna modell förbättrar på en naiv bayes baslinje med cirka 8 procent på träningsset.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் பங்கிடப்பட்ட ALANIS அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. நாம் மூன்று வகையான விருப்பங்களை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான ஒரு அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம், மற்றும் மூன்று விருப்பங்களை கண்டுபிடிப்பது The system uses a logistic regression model in subtask A and a voted classifier system with manually developed features to identify ironic tweets. இந்த மாதிரி பயிற்சி அமைப்பில் 8 சதவிகிதத்தை மேம்படுத்துகிறது.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ آلانیس سیسٹم کی توصیف کرتا ہے جس نے SemEval-2018 کی ٹاکس 3 میں شامل کیا ہے. ہم اہرونی کا شناسایا کرنے کے لئے ایک سیستم پیدا کریں گے، اور تین نوع اہرونی کا شناسایا کریں گے: کلام پالنی اہرونی، دوسری کلام اہرونی، اور موقعیت اہرونی۔ سیسٹم نے A کے سپٹپرس میں ایک لوجیسٹیک ریگرس موڈل کو استعمال کرتا ہے اور ایک وٹ کی کلیسٹر سیسٹم کے ساتھ مستقل طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کی ویٹوں کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے۔ یہ موڈل ایک نیوی بیس لین پر تقریباً 8 فیصد تکلیف سٹ کے ذریعہ سودا ہوتا ہے.', 'uz': 'Bu hujjat SemEval-2018 Vazifaning 3 Ishga murojaat qiladigan ALANIS tizimini anglatadi. Biz kekkizlik tizimni aniqlash va uch turini aniqlash uchun tizimni yaratumiz: verbal polar ironi, boshqa verbal ironi va holat ironi. Name Bu model taʼminlovchi satrdan 8 foiz asosiy baytlarida bajaradi.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống ALANS đã tham gia Nhiệm vụ 3 của Semkhai-thẩm 8. Chúng tôi phát triển một hệ thống để khám phá sự trớ trêu, cũng như khám phá ra ba loại mỉa mai bằng miệng, sự trớ trêu bằng miệng, và một tính toán trớ trêu. Hệ thống sử dụng một mô hình phục hồi hàng hoá theo phụ đề A và một hệ thống phân loại đã được chọn bằng tay có khả năng phát triển để nhận diện tweet trớ trêu. Mô hình này cải thiện trên một lớp khờ dại cơ bản bằng khoảng tám phần trăm trên bộ huấn luyện.', 'hr': 'Ovaj novinar opisuje sustav ALANIS koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 3 od semiEvala-2018. Razvijamo sustav za otkrivanje ironija, kao i otkrivanje tri vrsta ironija: verbalna polarna ironija, druga verbalna ironija i situacionalna ironija. Sistem koristi model logističke regresije u podpitanju A i glasački klasifikatorski sustav s ručno razvijenim karakteristikama za identifikaciju ironičkih tweets. Ovaj model se poboljšava na početnoj liniji naivnih zaljeva za oko 8 posto na obuku.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата АЛАНИС, участвала в Задача 3 на СемЕвал-2018. Разработваме система за откриване на ирония, както и за откриване на три вида ирония: вербална полярна ирония, друга вербална ирония и ситуационна ирония. Системата използва логистичен регресионен модел в подзадача А и гласувана класификационна система с ръчно разработени функции за идентифициране на иронични туитове. Този модел подобрява наивната базова база с около 8% на тренировъчния комплект.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver det ALANIS system, der deltog i opgave 3 af SemEval-2018. Vi udvikler et system til detektering af ironi, samt detektering af tre typer ironi: verbal polar ironi, anden verbal ironi og situationsironi. Systemet bruger en logistisk regressionsmodel i underopgave A og et stemt klassificeringssystem med manuelt udviklede funktioner til at identificere ironiske tweets. Denne model forbedrer på en naiv bayes baseline med omkring 8 procent på træningssæt.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het ALANIS systeem dat deelnam aan Taak 3 van SemEval-2018. We ontwikkelen een systeem voor detectie van ironie, evenals de detectie van drie soorten ironie: verbale polaire ironie, andere verbale ironie en situationele ironie. Het systeem maakt gebruik van een logistiek regressiemodel in subtaak A en een gestemd classificatiesysteem met handmatig ontwikkelde functies om ironische tweets te identificeren. Dit model verbetert op een naïeve bayes baseline met ongeveer 8 procent op trainingsset.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt das ALANIS-System, das an Task 3 von SemEval-2018 teilgenommen hat. Wir entwickeln ein System zur Erkennung von Ironie, sowie die Erkennung von drei Arten von Ironie: verbale polare Ironie, andere verbale Ironie und situative Ironie. Das System verwendet ein logistisches Regressionsmodell in Teilaufgabe A und ein gewähltes Klassifizierungssystem mit manuell entwickelten Funktionen, um ironische Tweets zu identifizieren. Dieses Modell verbessert sich auf einer naiven Bayes Baseline um etwa 8 Prozent am Trainingsset.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ALANIS را توصیف می\u200cکند که در کار ۳ از نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ شرکت کرده است. ما یک سیستم برای شناسایی ایرونی و کشف سه نوع ایرونی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم: ایرونی قطعه\u200cی ویرونی، ایرونی\u200cهای ویرونی دیگر و ایرونی موقعیت. این سیستم از یک مدل تکرار لوژیک در زیر سوال A استفاده می\u200cکند و یک سیستم مختصر رای داده شده با ویژگی\u200cهای دستی توسعه شده برای شناسایی توئیت\u200cهای مسخره\u200cای استفاده می\u200cکند. این مدل در یک خط پایین ساده به حدود ۸ درصد در مجموعه آموزش بهتر می شود.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18퀘스트3에 참여한ALANIS시스템을 소개한다.우리는 풍자 검출 시스템을 개발했고 세 가지 풍자 검출, 즉 언어의 극성 풍자, 다른 언어의 풍자와 상황의 풍자 검출을 개발했다.이 시스템은 하위 작업 a에서 논리 회귀 모델을 사용하고 수동 개발 기능을 가진 투표 분류기 시스템을 사용하여 풍자 추문을 식별한다.이 모형은 훈련집에서 소박 베일스 기선보다 약 8퍼센트 높아졌다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem ALANIS yang berpartisipasi dalam Tugas 3 SemEval-2018. Kami mengembangkan sistem untuk deteksi ironi, serta deteksi tiga jenis ironi: ironi kutub verbal, ironi verbal lainnya, dan ironi situasi. Sistem menggunakan model regresi logistik dalam subtask A dan sistem pemilih pemilih dengan ciri-ciri yang dikembangkan secara manual untuk mengidentifikasi tweet ironis. Model ini meningkat pada dasar bayes naif sekitar 8 persen dalam set latihan.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz ALANIS sistemini SemEval-2018-nji gören 3-nji zada goşulan hasaplaýar. Biz irony tapmak üçin sistemasyny we üç tür irony tanamak üçin ýetişdirip otyrýarys: verbal polar irony, başga verbal irony we ýagdaýy irony. Bu sistem ironik tweetleri tanamak üçin A süýtgede logatik regressiýa nusgasyny ulanýar. Bu nusga döwürli baýtalar boýunça liniýada 8 prosent ýakynda gelinýär.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin ALANIS që mori pjesë në detyrën 3 të SemEval-2018. Ne zhvillojmë një sistem për zbulimin e ironisë, si dhe zbulimin e tre llojeve ironisë: ironi polare verbale, ironi tjetër verbale dhe ironi situatore. Sistemi përdor një model logjik regresioni në nënpyetje A dhe një sistem klasifikues votuar me karakteristika të zhvilluara manualisht për të identifikuar tweets ironikë. Ky model përmirësohet në një bazë naive bayes me rreth 8 përqind në grupin e trajnimit.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSemEval-2018 ስራ 3 ላይ የተካፈለውን ALANIS ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ We develop a system for detection of irony, as well as the detection of three types of irony: verbal polar irony, other verbal irony, and situational irony.  ሲስተምሩ አዳራቢ ስራ አ እና የጣራ ትዊተቶችን ለማግኘት እጃቸው የተመረጠው ክፍተቶችን የተመሳሳይ ስርዓት ይጠቅማል፡፡ ይህ ምሳሌ የኢንቢብ ባይስ በመስመር ላይ 8 በመቶ የሚያሳድግ ነው፡፡', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa ALANIS ambao ulishiriki kazi ya 3 ya SemEval-2018. Tunaendeleza mfumo wa kutambua kejeli, pamoja na kutambua aina tatu za kejeli: kejeli za kimbunga, kejeli nyingine za kimapenzi na mazingira. Mfumo huo unatumia muundo wa kudhibiti vizuri katika kazi A na mfumo wa kutangaza kura kwa manufaa ili kutambua twiti za kejeli. Mfano huu unaboresha kwenye bao la naibu kwa takriban asilimia 8 kwenye seti ya mafunzo.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է ԱԼԱՆԻՍ համակարգը, որը մասնակցել է 2018-ի «ՍեմԵվալ» 3-ի հանձնարարության: Մենք զարգանում ենք հեգնագիտության հայտնաբերման համակարգ, ինչպես նաև երեք տեսակի հեգնագիտության հայտնաբերման: լեբալ հյուսիսային հեգնագիտություն, այլ լեբալ հեգնագիտություն և իրավիճակական հեգնագիտություն: Համակարգը օգտագործում է լոգոստիկ ռեգրեսիայի մոդել A-ի ենթահարցում և քվեարկված դասակարգչային համակարգ, որն ունի ձեռքով զարգացած հատկություններ, որպեսզի հայտնաբերի հեգնական թվիթե Այս մոդելը բարելավվում է նայիվ բեյսերի հիմնական տարածքում՝ մոտ 8 տոկոսով վարժեցման համակարգում:', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die ALANIS stelsel wat in Taak 3 van SemEval-2018 gedeel het. Ons ontwikkel 'n stelsel vir opdekking van ironie, en ook die opdekking van drie tipes ironie: verbale polar ironie, ander verbale ironie en situasielike ironie. Die stelsel gebruik 'n logistike regresie model in subtask A en 'n stemde klassifiseerder stelsel met hand ontwikkelde funksies om ironiese tweets te identifiseer. Hierdie model verbeter op 'n naive bayes basislien by omtrent 8 persent op onderwerp stel.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা আলানিস ব্যবস্থার ব্যাখ্যা করেছে যা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে। আমরা তিনটি ধরনের হাস্যকর পরিচয়ের জন্য একটি সিস্টেম তৈরি করি, আর তিনটি ধরনের বিদ্রুপের আবিষ্কার করি: ভার্বাল পোলারের বিদ্রোহ, অন্যান্য বৈদ সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করে সাবক্ষেত্র A-এ একটি লজিস্টিক রিপোর্শন মডেল ব্যবহার করে এবং বিদ্রূপ টুইট চিহ্নিত করার জন্য একটি ভোট দেয়া ব্যবস্ এই মডেলটি প্রশিক্ষণ সেটে প্রায় ৮ শতাংশের মাধ্যমে একটি নাইভ বেইজ বেসেলাইনে উন্নত হয়।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem ALANIS koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 3 od semiEvala-2018. Razvijamo sistem za otkrivanje ironija, kao i otkrivanje tri vrsta ironija: verbalna polarna ironija, druga verbalna ironija i situacionalna ironija. Sistem koristi model logističke regresije u podpitanju A i glasački klasifikatorski sistem s ručno razvijenim karakteristikama za identifikaciju ironičkih tweeta. Ovaj model se poboljšava na naivnoj bazi na osnovnoj liniji za oko 8 posto na setu obuke.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém ALANIS, který se podílel na úkolu 3 SemEval-2018. Vyvíjíme systém pro detekci ironie, stejně jako detekci tří typů ironie: verbální polární ironie, další verbální ironie a situační ironie. Systém využívá logistický regresní model v podúkolu A a hlasovaný klasifikátor s ručně vyvinutými funkcemi pro identifikaci ironických tweetů. Tento model se zlepšuje na naivní základně bayes o asi osm procent na tréninkové sadě.', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval-3 Task 3-in ə katılan ALANIS sistemini təsbiq edir. Biz ironi keşfetmək üçün sistemi və üç tür ironi keşfetmək üçün: verbal polar ironi, başqa verbal ironi və vəziyyət ironi. Sistem A subtask içində loģistiki regresiya modelini və səsləndiyi klasifikatçı sistemini əl təşkil edilmiş xüsusiyyətlərlə istifadə edir. Bu modellər təhsil qutusunda naif bayes baseline'də 8%-dən artırır.", 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu el sistema ALANIS que va participar a la tasca 3 de SemEval-2018. Desenvolvem un sistema de detecció de l'ironia, com també la detecció de tres tipus d'ironia: ironia polar verbal, altre ironia verbal i ironia situacional. El sistema utilitza un model de regressió logística en la subtema A i un sistema de classificació votat amb característiques desenvolupades manualment per identificar els tweets irònics. Aquest model millora en una baia naiva en un 8% en el conjunt d'entrenaments.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse ALANIS süsteemi, mis osales SemEval-2018 ülesandes 3. Arendame süsteemi iroonia tuvastamiseks, samuti kolme tüüpi iroonia tuvastamiseks: verbaalne polaariroonia, muu verbaalne iroonia ja situatsiooniroonia. Süsteem kasutab alaülesandes A logistilist regressioonimudelit ja käsitsi väljatöötatud funktsioonidega hääletatud klassifitseerimissüsteemi irooniliste säutsude tuvastamiseks. See mudel parandab naiivset bayes baasi umbes 8% võrra treeningkomplekti.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan ALANIS-järjestelmää, joka osallistui SemEval-2018:n tehtävään 3. Kehitämme järjestelmän ironian havaitsemiseen sekä kolmen ironian tyypin havaitsemiseen: verbaalisen polaarisen ironian, muun verbaalisen ironian ja tilanneradionian. Järjestelmä käyttää alatehtävässä A olevaa logistista regressiomallia ja manuaalisesti kehitettyä luokittelijärjestelmää ironisten twiittien tunnistamiseen. Tämä malli parantaa naiivia bayes-lähtötasoja noin 8 prosenttia harjoitussarjassa.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem ALANIS, ki je sodeloval pri nalogi 3 SemEval-2018. Razvijamo sistem za odkrivanje ironije in odkrivanje treh vrst ironije: verbalne polarne ironije, druge verbalne ironije in situacijske ironije. Sistem uporablja logistični regresijski model v podnalogi A in glasovani klasifikacijski sistem z ročno razvitimi funkcijami za prepoznavanje ironičnih tweetov. Ta model izboljšuje naivno bayesovo osnovno vrednost za približno 8 odstotkov pri treningu.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana the AIANIS system wanda ya yi shirin aikin na 3 of Semeval-2018. Tuna buɗe wani na'urar kwamfyuta, da kuma za'a gane nau'i-nau'i-nau'i uku: The system uses a logistic regression model in subtask A and a voted classifier system with manually developed features to identify ironic tweets.  Wannan shirin ya fi ƙaranci a kan basalin bayes na naƙasan kwamfyuta da taki asilimi 8 a daidaita mafarin aiki.", 'jv': 'Ngetong iki rambarang panjenengan sistem AlANis sing nyengkuyung tanggal 3 ning semiinval-2013. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem kanggo kebuturan irune, lan kebuturan luwih irune soko iso nggawe: irune polar, ireni verbal itgadhakan lan ireni sing wis ngerasakno. Sistem sistem gunakake model réaksiyon nggawe tarjamahan A lan sistem sing dipoleh kanggo ngubah manut sing bisa dianggap kanggo Ketoke Tis Erojèn Ndeleng iki lak bantuan ing batik, dadi, sekang batik', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval-2018 དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟ་བུའི་ALANIS་གི་མ་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་irony་ཕྱོགས་ལྟ་བུའི་རིགས་ལ་དུ་རྐྱེན་ལྟ་བ་ཞིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཆགས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདིའི་མ་ལག་གིས་ལག་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྤྱད་ནས་A་དང་ཞུ་གཏོང་གི་མ་ལག་གིས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས མིག', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכת ALANIS שהשתתפה במשימה 3 של SemEval-2018. We develop a system for detection of irony, as well as the detection of three types of irony: verbal polar irony, other verbal irony, and situational irony.  המערכת משתמשת במודל גירוס לוגיסטי בתא-שאלה א ומערכת קלאסיפור מוצבעה עם תכונות מפותחות ידנית לזהות טוויטים אירוניים. הדוגמא הזאת משתפרת על בסיס המפרצות הנייביים בערך 8 אחוזים על הסט האימונים.'}
{'en': 'UWB at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Irony detection in English tweets', 'ar': 'UWB في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: الكشف عن المفارقة في التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية', 'pt': 'UWB no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês', 'fr': "UWB au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 3\xa0: Détection de l'ironie dans les tweets anglais", 'es': 'La UWB en SemEval-2018 Tarea 3: Detección de ironía en tuits en inglés', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のUWBタスク3 ：英語ツイートでの皮肉検出', 'zh': 'UWB在SemEval-2018务3:英语推文讽刺性检', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर UWB: अंग्रेजी tweets में विडंबना का पता लगाने', 'ru': 'UWB на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Обнаружение иронии в твитах на английском языке', 'ga': 'UWB ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Brath íoróin i dtvuíteanna Béarla', 'ka': 'UWB SemEval-2018 დავალება 3: ინგლისური ტივიტებში იპონიის განახლება', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα Αγγλικά tweets', 'hu': 'UWB a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Irónia felismerése angol tweetekben', 'mk': 'UWB at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets', 'it': "UWB a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Rilevamento dell'ironia nei tweet inglesi", 'ms': 'UWB di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Pengesanan ironi dalam tweet Inggeris', 'mt': 'UWB at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets', 'lt': 'UWB SemEval-2018 3 užduotis: ironijos nustatymas anglų tweetuose', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3:', 'kk': 'UWB жалпы-2018 тапсырма 3: ағылшын tweets тізімінде ирония анықтау', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3: ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഐറോനി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'no': 'UWB på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Ironioppdaging i engelske tweeter', 'pl': 'UWB na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Wykrywanie ironii w angielskich tweetach', 'ro': 'UWB la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Detectarea ironiei în tweeturile în limba engleză', 'sr': 'UWB na semiEval-2018 Task 3: detekcija Ironija na engleskim tweetima', 'sv': 'UWB på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Ironi upptäckt i engelska tweets', 'si': 'UWB at semeval-2018 Job 3: Ironic Detection in English tweets', 'so': 'UWB-ka-SemEval-2018 Shaqada 3: Garashada ajaaniga ee Tweetka Ingiriiska', 'ta': 'UWB at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 3 میں UWB: انگلیسی ٹویٹ میں ایرونی شناسایی', 'uz': 'SemEval-2018 Vazifa 3: Ingliz tweetida Iron aniqlash', 'vi': 'UWB tại SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 3: Phát hiện mỉa mai trên tweet tiếng Anh', 'hr': 'UWB na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Ironijska otkrića na engleskim tweetima', 'nl': 'UWB op SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Ironie detectie in Engelse tweets', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Откриване на ирония в английски туитове', 'da': 'UWB på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Ironi opdagelse i engelske tweets', 'de': 'UWB auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Ironie Detection in englischen Tweets', 'id': 'UWB di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Deteksi ironi dalam tweet Inggris', 'ko': 'UWB가SemEval-18 퀘스트 3: 영어 트윗에서의 반풍 검사', 'fa': 'UWB در کار ۳: شناسایی آیرونی در tweets انگلیسی', 'sw': 'UWB kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Kugundua Uhisia katika twiti za Kiingereza', 'af': 'UWB by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 3: Irony beskrywing in Engels tweets', 'sq': 'UWB në SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detection of Irony in English tweets', 'tr': 'UWB at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English tweets', 'am': 'ስራ 3: በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች የኢዮኒያን አግኝቷል', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩: ইংরেজি টুইটে আইরোনি সন্ধান', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 G√∂z…ôl 3: ńįngilizce tweetl…ôrd…ô Irony Detection', 'hy': 'UwB-ը, 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ" 3-րդ հանձնարարությունը. անգլերենի թվիթերում հեռավորության հայտնաբերումը', 'cs': 'UWB na SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Detekce ironie v anglických tweetech', 'ca': 'UWB a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detection of irony in English tweets', 'bs': 'UWB na semiEval-2018 Task 3: detekcija Ironija na engleskim tweetima', 'et': 'UWB SemEval-2018 ülesanne 3: iroonia tuvastamine inglise tweets', 'fi': 'UWB SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Ironian havaitseminen englanniksi twiitteissä', 'jv': 'UWB nang semebal-2008 task 3: Kemerdekaan Kemerdekaan Inggris Tuit', 'he': 'UWB ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: גילוי אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים', 'sk': 'UWB na SemEval-2018 Naloga 3: Odkrivanje ironije v angleških tweetih', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'UWB at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system created for the SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Irony detection in English tweets. Our strongly constrained system uses only the provided training data without any additional external resources. Our system is based on Maximum Entropy classifier and various features using parse tree, POS tags, and morphological features. Even without additional lexicons and word embeddings we achieved fourth place in Subtask A and seventh in Subtask B in terms of accuracy.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا الذي تم إنشاؤه لمهمة SemEval-2018 3: الكشف عن المفارقة في التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية. يستخدم نظامنا شديد التقييد فقط بيانات التدريب المقدمة دون أي موارد خارجية إضافية. يعتمد نظامنا على مصنف Maximum Entropy والعديد من الميزات باستخدام شجرة التحليل وعلامات POS والميزات المورفولوجية. لقد حققنا المركز الرابع في Subtask A والسابع في Subtask B من حيث الدقة ، حتى بدون المعاجم الإضافية وحفلات الزفاف.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema criado para a Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2018: Detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês. Nosso sistema fortemente restrito usa apenas os dados de treinamento fornecidos sem quaisquer recursos externos adicionais. Nosso sistema é baseado no classificador de Entropia Máxima e vários recursos usando árvore de análise, tags POS e recursos morfológicos. Mesmo sem léxicos e incorporações de palavras adicionais, alcançamos o quarto lugar na Subtarefa A e o sétimo na Subtarefa B em termos de precisão.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système créé pour la Tâche 3\xa0: Détection de l'ironie dans les tweets en anglais de SEMEVAL-2018. Notre système fortement contraint utilise uniquement les données de formation fournies sans ressources externes supplémentaires. Notre système est basé sur le classificateur d'entropie maximale et diverses fonctionnalités utilisant l'arbre d'analyse, les balises POS et les caractéristiques morphologiques. Même sans lexiques et intégrations de mots supplémentaires, nous avons obtenu la quatrième place dans la sous-tâche A et la septième place dans la sous-tâche B en termes de précision.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro sistema creado para la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Detección de ironía en tuits en inglés. Nuestro sistema fuertemente limitado utiliza solo los datos de entrenamiento proporcionados sin ningún recurso externo adicional. Nuestro sistema se basa en el clasificador de máxima entropía y en varias funciones que utilizan árbol de análisis, etiquetas POS y características morfológicas. Incluso sin léxicos adicionales e incrustaciones de palabras, logramos el cuarto lugar en la subtarea A y el séptimo lugar en la subtarea B en términos de precisión.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweetsのために作成されたシステムについて説明します。当社の強く制約されたシステムは、外部リソースを追加することなく、提供されたトレーニングデータのみを使用します。当社のシステムは、最大エントロピー分類器と、解析ツリー、POSタグ、および形態学的特徴を使用したさまざまな特徴に基づいています。追加の辞書や単語の埋め込みがなくても、サブタスクAで4位、サブタスクBで7位の正確さを実現しました。', 'zh': '本文引我为SemEval-2018务3创建之统,英语推文之刺检。 臣等严受限统仅用训练数据,无所资于外。 凡我之大熵器用解析树,POS标形之征。 虽无额外词典与词嵌,在子职A中第四,在子职B中第七。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 टास्क 3 के लिए बनाई गई हमारी प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है: अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाना। हमारी दृढ़ता से विवश प्रणाली किसी भी अतिरिक्त बाहरी संसाधनों के बिना केवल प्रदान किए गए प्रशिक्षण डेटा का उपयोग करती है। हमारी प्रणाली अधिकतम एन्ट्रॉपी क्लासिफायर और पार्स ट्री, पीओएस टैग और रूपात्मक सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके विभिन्न सुविधाओं पर आधारित है। यहां तक कि अतिरिक्त शब्दकोशों और शब्द एम्बेडिंग के बिना भी हमने सटीकता के मामले में सबटास्क ए में चौथा और सबटास्क बी में सातवां स्थान हासिल किया।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система, созданная для задачи 3 SemEval-2018: Обнаружение иронии в твитах на английском языке. Наша сильно ограниченная система использует только предоставленные обучающие данные без каких-либо дополнительных внешних ресурсов. Наша система основана на классификаторе максимальной энтропии и различных особенностях с использованием дерева синтаксического анализа, POS-тегов и морфологических особенностей. Даже без дополнительных лексиконов и вложений слов мы достигли четвертого места в подзадаче А и седьмого в подзадаче Б по точности.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras a cruthaíodh don Tasc 3 SemEval-2018: Brath íoróin i dtvuíteanna Béarla. Ní úsáideann ár gcóras srianta go láidir ach na sonraí oiliúna a chuirtear ar fáil gan aon acmhainní seachtracha breise. Tá ár gcóras bunaithe ar Uasmhéid aicmitheora eantrópachta agus gnéithe éagsúla ag baint úsáide as crann parse, clibeanna POS, agus gnéithe moirfeolaíocha. Fiú gan foclóirí agus leabú focal breise bhaineamar an ceathrú háit amach i bhFothasc A agus an seachtú háit i bhFothasc B ó thaobh cruinnis de.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας που δημιουργήθηκε για την εργασία 3: ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα αγγλικά tweets. Το αυστηρά περιορισμένο σύστημά μας χρησιμοποιεί μόνο τα παρεχόμενα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης χωρίς πρόσθετους εξωτερικούς πόρους. Το σύστημά μας βασίζεται στον ταξινομητή μέγιστης Entropie και διάφορα χαρακτηριστικά χρησιμοποιώντας δέντρο ανάλυσης, ετικέτες και μορφολογικά χαρακτηριστικά. Ακόμη και χωρίς πρόσθετα λεξικά και ενσωμάτωση λέξεων φτάσαμε στην τέταρτη θέση στην Υποεργασία Α και έβδομη στην Υποεργασία Β όσον αφορά την ακρίβεια.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection angol tweetekben létrehozott rendszerünket. Erősen korlátozott rendszerünk kizárólag a megadott képzési adatokat használja fel további külső erőforrások nélkül. Rendszerünk a Maximális Entrópia osztályozón és különböző funkciókon alapul, parse fa, POS címkék és morfológiai jellemzők segítségével. További lexikonok és szóbeágyazások nélkül is a pontosság szempontjából negyedik helyet értünk el az A. alfeladatban, a B. alfeladatban pedig hetedik helyet értünk el.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama mūsų sistema, sukurta SemEval-2018 3 užduotyje: ironijos nustatymas anglų tweetuose. Mūsų griežtai ribota sistema naudoja tik pateiktus mokymo duomenis be papildomų išorės išteklių. Mūsų sistema grindžiama didžiausio entropijos klasifikatoriumi ir įvairiomis savybėmis, naudojant analizuojamus medžius, POS ženklus ir morfologines savybes. Net be papildomų tekstikonų ir žodžių įterpimo mes pasiekėme ketvirtąją vietą A posėdyje ir septintąją B posėdyje tikslumo požiūriu.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema creato per SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection nei tweet inglesi. Il nostro sistema fortemente limitato utilizza solo i dati di formazione forniti senza ulteriori risorse esterne. Il nostro sistema si basa sul classificatore di Entropia massima e su varie caratteristiche che utilizzano albero di analisi, tag POS e caratteristiche morfologiche. Anche senza ulteriori lessici e incorporazioni di parole abbiamo raggiunto il quarto posto nella sottomissione A e il settimo nella sottomissione B in termini di accuratezza.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің жүйеңізді жарым- 2018 тапсырма 3- үшін құрылған тапсырма үшін сипаттайды: ағылшын тійтіндегі иронияны анықтау. Біздің күш шектелген жүйеміз тек қосымша сыртқы ресурстар болмаса келтірілген оқыту деректерін қолданады. Біздің жүйеміз ентропия классификациясының максималдығына негізделген, бұтақ, POS тегтерін және морфологиялық мүмкіндіктерін талдау үшін әртүрлі мүмкінді Қосымша лексикандар мен сөздерді ендіру жоқ болмаса да біз A-ның төртінші жерін және B-ның төртінші тапсырмасында дұрыс түрде жеткіздік.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем создаден за SemEval-2018 задача 3: Детектирање на иронија на англиски твитови. Нашиот силно ограничен систем користи само обезбедени податоци за обука без дополнителни надворешни ресурси. Нашиот систем е базиран на класификатор на Максимална Ентропија и различни карактеристики користејќи анализирано дрво, POS ознаки и морфолошки карактеристики. Дури и без дополнителни лексикони и зборови, постигнавме четврто место во подзадачата А и седмо во подзадачата Б во поглед на прецизноста.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita yang dicipta untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: pengesan ironi dalam tweet Inggeris. Sistem kita yang ketat menggunakan data latihan yang diberikan tanpa sumber luar tambahan. Sistem kita berdasarkan pengklasifikasi Entropi Maksimum dan pelbagai ciri-ciri menggunakan pepohon hurai, tag POS, dan ciri-ciri morfologik. Even without additional lexicons and word embeddings we achieved fourth place in Subtask A and seventh in Subtask B in terms of accuracy.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემის შექმნა SemEval-2018 დავალებისთვის სამუშაო დავალების სამუშაო: ინგლისური tweets-ში იპრონიის განახლება. ჩვენი ძალიან დარწყებული სისტემის გამოყენება მხოლოდ განაკეთებული განაკეთებული მონაცემები გარეშე რესურსების გარეშე. ჩვენი სისტემა მაქსიმიმური ენტეპოფიის კლასიფიკაციაზე და განსხვავებული ფუნქციების გამოყენებაში პარასი ხე, POS ჭდეები და მორფოლოგიური ფუნქციები. კიდევ დამატებული ლექსიკონის და სიტყვების შემდეგ ჩვენ მივიღეთ მეოთხედი ადგილში A და მეჟვედი სამუშაო B სამუშაო სამუშაო დამატებით.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3: ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ട്രീറ്റില്\u200d ഐറോനി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത്  നമ്മുടെ ശക്തിയായ നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ സിസ്റ്റം പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാതെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലന വ ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d എന്റ്രോപ്പി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കറിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പാര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷത്തില്\u200d,  കൂടുതല്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കങ്ങളും വാക്കുകളും കൂടാതെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നാലാമത്തെ സ്ഥലത്തേക്ക് എത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. സബ്ബ്ബസ് ബിയില്\u200d ഏഴ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний системийг SemEval-2018 Task 3-д бий болгон тайлбарлаж байна: Англи хэлний tweets дээр газрын тодорхойлолт. Бидний хүчтэй хязгаарлагдсан систем зөвхөн дасгал хөтөлбөрийн мэдээллийг ашигладаг. Бидний систем Максимум Энтропийн хуваарилагч болон олон төрлийн төрлийн хуваарилагч мод, POS тегтэй болон морфологик төрлийн төрлийг ашиглаж байна. Тэр үед нэмэлт хэлбэрүүд болон үг нэмэлт хэлбэрээс ч бид 4 дахь орон Subtask A болон 7 дахь нь Subtask B-д зөв байдалд хүргэсэн.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna maħluqa għas-SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets. Is-sistema tagħna limitata ħafna tuża biss id-dejta tat-taħriġ ipprovduta mingħajr riżorsi esterni addizzjonali. Is-sistema tagħna hija bbażata fuq il-klassifikatur tal-Entropija Massima u karatteristiċi varji bl-użu tas-siġar tal-analizzar, it-tikketti POS, u karatteristiċi morfoloġiċi. Anke mingħajr lexicons addizzjonali u inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem kisbet ir-raba’ post fis-Subkompitu A u s-seba’ fis-Subkompitu B f’termini ta’ preċiżjoni.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt laga for semiEval-2018 oppgåva 3: Ironioppdaging i engelske tweets. Vårt sterkt begrenset systemet brukar berre dei oppgjevne treningsdata utan eksterne ressursar. Systemet vårt er basert på maksimum entropy- klassifisering og ulike funksjonar med tolking tre, POS- taggar og morfologiske funksjonar. Selv utan ekstra leksikon og ordinnbygging, oppnådd vi fjerde plass i Subtask A og syttende i Subtask B med nøyaktighet.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system stworzony dla SemEval-2018 Task 3: Wykrywanie ironii w angielskich tweetach. Nasz silnie ograniczony system wykorzystuje tylko dostarczone dane treningowe bez dodatkowych zasobów zewnętrznych. Nasz system oparty jest na klasyfikatorze maksymalnej entropii i różnych funkcjach wykorzystujących drzewo parse, tagi POS oraz cechy morfologiczne. Nawet bez dodatkowych leksykonów i osadzeń słów osiągnęliśmy czwarte miejsce w podzadaniu A i siódme w podzadaniu B pod względem dokładności.', 'so': 'This paper describes our system created for the SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets.  nidaamkayaga aad u adag ayaa isticmaalaya macluumaadka waxbarashada oo la siiyey oo aan haysan wax kale oo dibada ah. Systemkanagu wuxuu ku saleysan yahay fasaxa ugu badnaan ee Entropy iyo waxyaabo kala duduwan oo isticmaalaya geedka baarlamaanka, boosaska POS iyo waxyaabaha morphologiga ah. Xataa sababo dheeraad ah oo aan lexico iyo hadal ka mid aheyn waxaan gaadhnay meel afraad ee Subtask A iyo toddobaad ee Subtask B si saxda ah.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 3 වෙනුවෙන් හැකියුම් විස්තර කරනවා: ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් වල අයිර අපේ බලාපොරොත්තු ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත නැතුව. අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්වාස කරුණාකරණය සහ විවිධ විශේෂ වර්ගය, POS ටැග් සහ මෝර්ෆෝලෝගික විශේ අවශ්\u200dය ලෙක්සිකොන්ස් සහ වචනය සම්බන්ඩින්ස් නැතුවත් අපි හතරවෙනි ස්ථානයක් අරගෙන හිටියා A සම්බන්ධ වැඩ B වල', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru creat pentru SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detectarea ironiei în tweeturile în limba engleză. Sistemul nostru puternic constrâns utilizează doar datele de instruire furnizate fără resurse externe suplimentare. Sistemul nostru se bazează pe clasificatorul Entropie Maximum și diverse caracteristici folosind arbore de parse, etichete POS și caracteristici morfologice. Chiar și fără lexicoane și încorporări de cuvinte suplimentare am obținut locul patru în Subsarcina A și al șaptelea în Subsarcina B în ceea ce privește acuratețea.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem koji je stvoren za zadatak 3. polu-Eval-2018: detekcija ironija na engleskim tweetima. Naš jak ograničeni sistem koristi samo podatke o obuci bez dodatnih vanjskih resursa. Naš sistem je zasnovan na maksimalnoj klasifikaciji entropije i različitim karakteristikama koristeći analizu drveta, oznake POS-a i morfološke karakteristike. Čak i bez dodatnih leksiona i uključenja reči postigli smo četvrto mesto u subtask A i sedmom u subtask B u smislu tačnosti.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system skapat för SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection i engelska tweets. Vårt starkt begränsade system använder endast de tillhandahållna träningsdata utan ytterligare externa resurser. Vårt system är baserat på Maximum Entropy klassificerare och olika funktioner med parse tree, POS taggar och morfologiska funktioner. Även utan ytterligare lexikon och ordinbäddningar uppnådde vi fjärde plats i deluppgift A och sjunde i deluppgift B när det gäller noggrannhet.', 'ta': 'SemEval-2018 செயல் 3: ஆங்கிலத்தில் அரட்டை கண்டுபிடிப்பதை விளக்குகிறது. எங்கள் கடுமையான கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட அமைப்பு கூடுதல் வெளி மூலங்கள் இல்லாமல் பயிற்சி தகவலை மட்டும் பயன்படு எங்கள் அமைப்பு அதிகபட்ச உள்ளீட்டு வகைப்பாளர் மற்றும் பல்வேறு பண்புகளை பார்ஸ் மரத்தில், POS ஒட்டுகள் மற்றும் குறிப்புகள் பயன் கூடுதல் லெக்சிக்ஸியன் மற்றும் வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கம் இல்லாமல் கூட நாம் துணை பணி A மற்றும் ஏழாவது இடத்தை சரியான முறையில் அட', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری سیسٹم کو سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس 3 کے لئے پیدا کیا گیا ہے: انگلیسی ٹویٹوں میں آئرونی شناسایی۔ ہماری مضبوط محدود سیستم صرف حاصل کئے ہوئے ترینسی ڈیٹے کے بغیر کسی اضافی خارج منبع کے استعمال کرتا ہے. ہماری سیستم مہربانی انتروپی کلاسیر پر بنیاد ہے اور مختلف فکرتوں پر پارس درخت، POS ٹاگ، اور مورفولوجی فکرتوں کے مطابق۔ اضافہ لکھانے کے بغیر اور کلمات انڈینگ کے ہم نے سوٹوک A میں چوتھا جگہ پہنچا اور سوٹوک B میں ساتھا جگہ درستی کے مطابق پہنچا۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 Vazifa 3: Ingliz tweetidagi Ironni aniqlash. Bizning qiyin qachon tizimmiz faqat qoʻshimcha tashqi rasmlar yoʻq taʼminlovchi maʼlumotdan foydalanadi. Bizning tizimmiz eng maximum Entropy classifier va parse daraxt, POS taglari va morfologik imkoniyatlarini yordamida turli xususiyatlar asosida. Koʻproq leksiz va so'zlar bilan birinchi darajada sub-vazifa A va 7 marta bo'lgan so'zlar tashkilotni tashkilotga olib keldi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống của chúng tôi được tạo ra cho nhiệm vụ SemEvol-208. Phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter của tiếng Anh. Hệ thống bị hạn chế kỹ lưỡng của chúng ta chỉ sử dụng dữ liệu huấn luyện cung cấp mà không có nguồn tài nguyên ngoài. Hệ thống của chúng ta dựa trên mật mã gốc tối đa và các tính năng khác nhau sử dụng cây phân, thẻ vị trí và các tính chất. Ngay cả không có từ ngữ thêm và sự nhúng tay từ chúng ta đã có vị trí thứ tư trong Subask A và thứ bảy trong Subask B về độ chính xác.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата система, създадена за задача 3: откриване на ирония в английски туитове. Нашата силно ограничена система използва само предоставените данни за обучение без допълнителни външни ресурси. Нашата система се основава на класификатор за максимална ентропия и различни функции, използвайки дърво за анализ, ПОС тагове и морфологични характеристики. Дори без допълнителни лексикони и вграждания на думи постигнахме четвърто място в Подзадача А и седмо в Подзадача Б по точност.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft ons systeem dat is gemaakt voor de SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ironie detection in Engelse tweets. Ons sterk beperkte systeem gebruikt alleen de verstrekte trainingsgegevens zonder extra externe middelen. Ons systeem is gebaseerd op Maximum Entropy classifier en verschillende functies met behulp van parse tree, POS tags en morfologische kenmerken. Zelfs zonder extra lexicons en woordinbeddingen behaalden we de vierde plaats in Subtaak A en zevende in Subtaak B qua nauwkeurigheid.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system skabt til SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Irony Detection i engelske tweets. Vores stærkt begrænsede system bruger kun de leverede træningsdata uden yderligere eksterne ressourcer. Vores system er baseret på Maximum Entropy klassificering og forskellige funktioner ved hjælp af parse træ, POS tags og morfologiske funktioner. Selv uden yderligere leksikoner og ordindlejringer opnåede vi fjerdepladsen i underopgave A og syvende i underopgave B med hensyn til nøjagtighed.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser System für die SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ironie Detection in English Tweets. Unser stark eingeschränktes System verwendet nur die bereitgestellten Trainingsdaten ohne zusätzliche externe Ressourcen. Unser System basiert auf dem Klassifikator Maximum Entropie und verschiedenen Funktionen mit Parse Tree, POS Tags und morphologischen Merkmalen. Auch ohne zusätzliche Lexikone und Worteinbettungen erreichten wir den vierten Platz in Unteraufgabe A und den siebten Platz in Unteraufgabe B hinsichtlich Genauigkeit.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav koji je stvoren za zadatak 3. iz poluvremenog ispitivanja 2018. godine: otkrivanje ironija na engleskim tweetima. Naš snažno ograničeni sustav koristi samo podatke o obuci bez dodatnih vanjskih resursa. Naš sustav se temelji na maksimalnoj klasifikaciji entropije i različitim karakteristikama koristeći analizu drveta, oznake POS-a i morfološke karakteristike. Čak i bez dodatnih leksiona i uključenja riječi postigli smo četvrto mjesto u podzadatku A i sedmom u podzadatku B u smislu točnosti.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18 임무3: 영어 트윗의 반어 검측을 위해 만든 시스템을 묘사한다.우리의 강력한 제약 시스템은 제공된 교육 데이터만 사용하고 추가 외부 자원을 사용하지 않는다.우리 시스템은 최대 엔트로피 분류기와 해석 트리, 어성 라벨과 형태 특징을 사용하는 각종 특징을 바탕으로 한다.별도의 어휘와 단어가 삽입되지 않아도 우리는 하위 퀘스트 A에서 4위, 하위 퀘스트 B에서 7위를 차지했다.', 'id': 'This paper describes our system created for the SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets.  Sistem kita yang sangat terbatas hanya menggunakan data pelatihan yang diberikan tanpa sumber daya eksternal tambahan. Sistem kita berdasarkan Klasifikasi Entropi Maksimum dan berbagai ciri menggunakan pohon analisis, tag POS, dan ciri-ciri morfologi. Bahkan tanpa leksikon tambahan dan pembangunan kata kami mencapai tempat keempat dalam Subtask A dan tujuh dalam Subtask B dalam terma akurasi.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu uliotengenezwa kwa ajili ya kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Ugunduzi wa ujinga katika twiti za Kiingereza. Mfumo wetu uliopo kwa nguvu inatumia taarifa za mafunzo tu bila rasilimali nyingine za nje. Mfumo wetu umejikita na sifa za kiwango kikubwa na tabia mbalimbali kwa kutumia mti wa parse, viungo vya POS na vipengele vya kifolojia. Hata bila lexico na maneno mengine mengi tulifanikiwa nafasi ya nne katika Vifungu A na saba katika Ujumbe B kwa sababu ya ukweli.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz biziň sistemamyzy SemEval-2018 Görevi 3 üçin bejerilmiş hasaplaýar: Iňlisçe tweetler bilen tapylýan aýdym. Biziň güýçli möhüm sistemamyz diňe daşaryk çeşmeler bolmadyk bilim maglumatyny ulanýar. Bizim sistemimiz Azami Giriş klasifikatçysyna we ağaç, POS tägleri we morfolojik özelliklerinden ullanýar. Diňe bir leksiýa we söz integrasy bolmadykça hem Subtask A we B Subtask B'de dördünji ýerde ýetip bardyk.", 'sq': 'Ky artikull përshkruan sistemin tonë të krijuar për SemEval-2018 Task 3: zbulimi i ironisë në tweetet angleze. Sistemi ynë i kufizuar përdor vetëm të dhënat e ushtrimit pa ndonjë burim shtesë të jashtëm. Sistemi ynë është bazuar në klasifikuesin e Entropisë Maksimale dhe karakteristika të ndryshme duke përdorur pemën e analizimit, etiketat POS dhe karakteristikat morfologjike. Edhe pa lexikona shtesë dhe përmbajtje fjalësh ne arritëm vendin e katërt në Subtask A dhe të shtatë në Subtask B në lidhje me saktësinë.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለSemEval-2018 ስራ 3 የተፈጠረውን ስርዓታችንን ይናገራል፤ በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች የኢዮርኔን ግለጽ ነው፡፡ በብርቱ ግድ የነበረውን ስርዓታችን ውጪ ሀብት ሳይኖር የተሰጠውን የድምፅ መረጃዎችን ብቻ ይጠቅማል፡፡ የፖስቲካችን መክፈቻ፣ የፖስስ መክፈቻ እና የሞፎሎጂ ምርጫዎች በመጠቀም ላይ መሠረት ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም ልስክሲ እና ቃላት ባይኖር እንኳ በአራተኛው ቦታ በSubtask A እና ሰባተኛው በመስፈሪያው B ውስጥ አግኝተናል፡፡', 'af': 'Hierdie papier beskrywe ons stelsel geskep vir die SemEval-2018 taak 3: Ironie beskrywing in Engelske tweets. Ons sterk bevestig stelsel gebruik slegs die verskaf onderwerp data sonder enige eksterne hulpbronne. Ons stelsel is gebaseer op Maksimum Entropie klassifiseerder en verskillende funksies gebruik verwerking boom, POS etikette en morfologiese funksies. Selfs sonder addisionele leksies en woord inbettings het ons vierde plek in Subtask A en sewende in Subtask B in terms of accuracy bereik.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را برای کار سوم Eval-2018 توضیح می دهد: شناسایی آهنی در tweets انگلیسی. سیستم محدود شدیدی ما فقط داده های آموزش داده شده بدون هیچ منابع خارجی بیشتر استفاده می کند. سیستم ما بر پایه بزرگترین گروه\u200cکننده\u200cی انتروپی و ویژگی\u200cهای مختلف با استفاده از درخت پرسی، نقاشی POS و ویژگی\u200cهای مورفولوژیکی است. حتی بدون زبان\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای و کلمه\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای به چهارمین مکان در Subtask A و هفتم در Subtask B به عنوان دقیق رسیدیم.', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt bizim sistemimizi SemEval-2018 Task 3 √ľ√ß√ľn yaratdńĪńüńĪmńĪzńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôyir: ńįngilizce tweetl…ôrd…ô Ironi keŇüfetm…ôsi. Bizim √ßox sńĪxńĪntńĪlńĪ sistemimiz yalnńĪz t…ôhsil verilmiŇü t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ baŇüqa bir dńĪŇü resursu olmadan istifad…ô edir. Sistemimiz Maksimum Entropy klasifikatńĪna dayanan v…ô m√ľxt…ôlif x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôr…ô analiz ańüacńĪ, POS etiketl…ôrini v…ô morfolojik x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôr…ô istifad…ô edir. ∆Źlav…ô dill…ôri v…ô s√∂zl…ôri istifad…ô edilm…ôd…ôn h…ôtta B Subtask A v…ô yedincisinin d√∂rd√ľnc√ľ yer…ô dońüruluqla g…ôldik.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգը, որը ստեղծվել է "ՍեմԷվալ-2018" 3-րդ հանձնարարության համար. անգլերենի թվիթերում հեռավորության հայտնաբերումը: Մեր ուժեղ սահմանափակ համակարգը օգտագործում է միայն տրամադրված ուսումնասիրության տվյալները առանց որևէ արտաքին ռեսուրսներ: Our system is based on Maximum Entropy classifier and various features using parse tree, POS tags, and morphological features.  Նույնիսկ առանց ավելացված լեքսիկոնների և բառերի ներդրման մենք հասանք չորրորդ տեղը A-ի ենթախնդրում և եօթներորդ տեղը B-ի ենթախնդրի ճշգրտության առումով:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেম বর্ণনা করেছে: ইংরেজী টুইটে আইরোনি সন্ধান। আমাদের শক্তিশালী নিয়ন্ত্রণ ব্যবস্থা শুধুমাত্র প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য ব্যবহার করে বাইরের কোনো সম্পদ ছাড়া। আমাদের সিস্টেম সর্বোচ্চ এন্ট্রোপি বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং পার্স গাছ, পোস ট্যাগ এবং মরোফোলিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার কর এমনকি আরো লেক্সিক্সি এবং শব্দ বিভিন্ন ব্যাপার ছাড়াও আমরা সাব্বাস বিত্তে চতুর্থ স্থান পৌঁছেছি।', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema creat per a la tasca 3 SemEval-2018: Detecció d'ironia en tweets anglès. El nostre sistema fortament restringit només utilitza les dades de formació proporcionades sense recursos externs adicionals. El nostre sistema està basat en la classificadora Maximum Entropy i diverses característiques utilitzant arbre d'analització, etiquetes POS i característiques morfològiques. Fins i tot sense lexicòns adicionals i incorporacions de paraules vam aconseguir el quart lloc a la Subtasca A i el segon a la Subtasca B en termes de precisió.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi, mis on loodud SemEval-2018 ülesandeks 3: iroonia tuvastamine inglise säutsudes. Meie tugevalt piiratud süsteem kasutab ainult esitatud koolitusandmeid ilma täiendavate välisressurssideta. Meie süsteem põhineb Maximum Entropy klassifikaatoril ja erinevatel funktsioonidel, kasutades parsimispuu, POS silte ja morfoloogilisi funktsioone. Isegi ilma täiendavate leksikonide ja sõnade manustamiseta saavutasime täpsuse poolest neljanda koha alamülesandes A ja seitsmenda alamülesandes B.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem stvoren za zadatak 3. iz polovine Evala-2018: detekcija ironija na engleskim tweetima. Naš jak ograničeni sistem koristi samo podatke o obuci bez dodatnih vanjskih resursa. Naš sistem je zasnovan na maksimalnoj klasifikaciji entropije i različitim karakteristikama koristeći analizu drveta, oznake POS-a i morfološke karakteristike. Čak i bez dodatnih leksiona i uključenja riječi postigli smo četvrto mjesto u subtask A i sedmom u subtask B u smislu tačnosti.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets -ohjelmaa varten luotua järjestelmäämme. Vahvasti rajoitettu järjestelmämme käyttää vain annettuja koulutustietoja ilman ulkoisia lisäresursseja. Järjestelmämme perustuu Maximum Entropy -luokitukseen ja erilaisiin ominaisuuksiin käyttäen jäsennyspuuta, POS-tunnisteita ja morfologisia ominaisuuksia. Ilman ylimääräisiä sanastoja ja sanaupotuksia saavutimme neljännen sijan alatehtävässä A ja seitsemännen alatehtävässä B tarkkuuden suhteen.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém vytvořený pro SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detekce ironie v anglických tweetech. Náš silně omezený systém využívá pouze poskytnutá tréninková data bez dalších externích zdrojů. Náš systém je založen na klasifikátoru Maximum Entropie a různých funkcích pomocí parse stromu, POS tagů a morfologických vlastností. I bez dalších slovníků a slovních vložení jsme dosáhli čtvrtého místa v podúkolu A a sedmého v podúkolu B z hlediska přesnosti.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing paling nggawe sistem sing gawe nggawe kanggo seminval-2013 task 3: Ketokan urip lan tuwit Inggris. Sistem-sistem sing nggawe barang-barang nggawe data yang dipunangé ora ono mulasai supoyo barang tanggal. Iso sistem dadi saben karo maximum Entropy geklaser podho karo pak ulih cara nggawe Sampeyan luwih dumadhi sing luwih dumadhi lan gambarang kelas embedding shadow, kita wis nambah kang 4 ing Subtask A lan wis pitik nang Subtask B dumadhi sing apik dadi.', 'ha': 'Bu takardan na bayyana tsarin mu wanda aka halicce wa aikin SemEV-2018 Tani 3: Zana gane Iron cikin Ingiriya. Ana amfani da matsayinmu wanda aka samar da shi kawai na da data wanda aka ba shi da shi ba da wani maɓallin bakwai. @ info: whatsthis Haƙĩƙa, bã da addin leko da word embeddings, ba mu sãmu rubu a cikin Subtas A da 7 a Subjob B in an daidaita.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem, ustvarjen za nalogo 3 SemEval-2018: Zaznavanje ironije v angleških tweetih. Naš močno omejen sistem uporablja samo zagotovljene podatke o usposabljanju brez dodatnih zunanjih virov. Naš sistem temelji na razvrščevalniku Maximum Entropy in različnih funkcijah, ki uporabljajo parse drevesa, POS oznake in morfološke značilnosti. Tudi brez dodatnih leksikonov in besednih vdelav smo dosegli četrto mesto v podnalogi A in sedmo v podnalogi B glede natančnosti.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו שנוצרה עבור המשימה השלישית SemEval-2018: זיהוי אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים. המערכת המוגבלת היטב שלנו משתמשת רק במידע האימונים הנוסף ללא משאבים חיצוניים נוספים. המערכת שלנו מבוססת על מסגר האנטרופיה המקסימלית והתכונות שונים באמצעות עץ מעבדה, תוויות POS, והתכונות מורפולוגיות. אפילו בלי לקסיקונים נוספים ומילים קיבלנו מקום רביעי בתפקיד א ושביעי בתפקיד ב במונחים מדויקים.', 'bo': 'ཤོག ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་སྟབས་བདེ་འཇགས་ངལ Our system is based on Maximum Entropy classifier and various features using parse tree, POS tags, and morphological features. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བཏུབ་པ་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་ང་ཚོས་ལས་གནད་སྡུད་དང་བདེན་བ'}
{'en': 'NIHRIO at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'ar': 'NIHRIO في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: نموذج شبكة عصبية بسيط ودقيق للكشف عن المفارقة في تويتر', 'es': 'NIHRIO en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Un modelo de red neuronal simple y preciso para la detección de ironía en Twitter', 'fr': "NIHRIO au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Un modèle de réseau de neurones simple et précis pour la détection de l'ironie sur Twitter", 'pt': 'NIHRIO na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Um modelo de rede neural simples e preciso para detecção de ironia no Twitter', 'ja': 'NIHRIO at SemEval -2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'zh': 'NIHRIO在SemEval-2018务3:Twitter以刺检之简而确神经网络', 'ru': 'NIHRIO на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Простая и точная модель нейронной сети для обнаружения иронии в Twitter', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर NIHRIO: चहचहाना में विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए एक सरल और सटीक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल', 'ga': 'NIHRIO ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Samhail Líonra Néarach Simplí agus Cruinn chun an Iarann a Bhrath ar Twitter', 'ka': 'NIHRIO SemEval-2018 სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მოდელი: სატვირტრში ერთადერთი და წესიერი ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელი', 'hu': 'NIHRIO a SemEval-2018 3. feladatán: Egyszerű és pontos ideghálózati modell az irónia felismeréséhez Twitteren', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ένα απλό και ακριβές μοντέλο Νευρικού Δικτύου για την Ανίχνευση ειρωνίας στο Twitter', 'it': "NIHRIO al SemEval-2018 Task 3: Un modello di rete neurale semplice e preciso per il rilevamento dell'ironia su Twitter", 'kk': 'NIHRIO жарым- 2018 тапсырмасы 3: Твиттердегі Ирония анықтау үшін қарапайым және нақты нейрондық желі үлгісі', 'lt': 'NIHRIO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'mk': 'НИХРИО на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Едноставен и прецизен модел на неурална мрежа за детекција на иронија на Твитер', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3-ലെ നിഹ്രിയോ', 'ms': 'NIHRIO di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Model Rangkaian Neural Sederhana dan Tepat untuk Pengesanan Ironi dalam Twitter', 'mn': 'NIHRIO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'no': 'NIHRIO på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Ein enkel og akkurat neuralnettverk- modell for Irony Detection i Twitter', 'mt': 'NIHRIO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'pl': 'NIHRIO na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Prosty i dokładny model sieci neuronowej do wykrywania ironii na Twitterze', 'ro': 'NIHRIO la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Un model de rețea neurală simplu și precis pentru detectarea ironiei în Twitter', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'NIHRIO na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 3: Jednostavni i precizan model neuronske mreže za detekciju Ironije na Twitter-u', 'so': 'Shaqada 3: A Simple and Accurated Neural Network Model for Ironin Detection of Twitter', 'sv': 'NIHRIO på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: En enkel och korrekt neural nätverksmodell för Irony Detection i Twitter', 'ta': 'NIHRIO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'ur': 'NIHRIO ٹویٹر میں سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس 3: ایک ساده اور دقیق نیورال نیورک موڈل توئیٹر میں ایرونی شناسایی کے لئے', 'vi': 'NIgiải tại Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task 3: Mô hình mạng thần kinh đơn giản và chính xác cho việc phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Прост и точен модел на неврална мрежа за откриване на ирония в Туитър', 'hr': 'NIHRIO na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 3: Jednostavni i precizan model neuronske mreže za detekciju Ironije na Twitter-u', 'de': 'NIHRIO auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Ein einfaches und genaues neuronales Netzwerkmodell zur Ironie-Erkennung in Twitter', 'nl': 'NIHRIO op SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Een eenvoudig en nauwkeurig neuraal netwerkmodel voor ironie detectie in Twitter', 'da': 'NIHRIO på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: En enkel og præcis neural netværksmodel til Irony Detection i Twitter', 'fa': 'NIHRIO در کار ۳: یک مدل شبکه عصبی ساده و دقیق برای شناسایی آهنی در توئیتر', 'id': 'NIHRIO di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Model jaringan saraf sederhana dan tepat untuk deteksi ironi di Twitter', 'ko': 'NIHRIO가SemEval-2018에서의 임무 3: 간단하고 정확한 신경 네트워크 모형으로 트위터 반어 검출에 사용', 'sw': 'NIHRIO katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Utamaduni wa Mtandao wa Nyaraka na Hesabu kwa ajili ya Kutambua Uholanzi katika Twita', 'tr': 'NIHRIO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Iron Detection in Twitter', 'sq': 'NIHRIO në SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'af': "NIHRIO by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 3: ' n Eenvoudige en Akkuraat Neural Netwerk Model vir Irony Opdekking in Twitter", 'am': 'ስራ 3', 'az': "NIHRIO'nun SemEval-2018 Task 3: Twitter'da Irony Detection üçün Basit və Doğru Nöral A ğ Modeli", 'hy': 'ՆԻՀRIՕ-ը, 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ" 3-րդ հանձնարարությունը. պարզ և ճշգրիտ նյարդային ցանցի մոդել Թվիթերում', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩-এ এনআইএইচরিও: টুইটারে আইরোনি সনাক্তির জন্য একটি সাধারণ এবং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Jednoduchý a přesný model neuronové sítě pro detekci ironie na Twitteru', 'ca': 'NIHRIO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'et': 'NIHRIO SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 3: Lihtne ja täpne neurovõrgu mudel iroonia tuvastamiseks Twitteris', 'fi': 'NIHRIO SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Yksinkertainen ja tarkka hermoverkkomalli ironian havaitsemiseen Twitterissä', 'bs': 'NIHRIO na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 3: Jednostavni i precizan model neuronske mreže za detekciju Ironije na Twitter-u', 'jv': 'NIHRIO at semi-2008 task 3: A Simple and Account Neral Network model for irny detection in Google', 'sk': 'NIHRIO na SemEval-2018 3. naloga: Preprost in natančen model živčnega omrežja za odkrivanje ironije v Twitterju', 'he': 'NIHRIO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'NIHRIO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Simple and Accurate Neural Network Model for Irony Detection in Twitter'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our NIHRIO system for SemEval-2018 Task 3 Irony detection in English tweets. We propose to use a simple neural network architecture of Multilayer Perceptron with various types of input features including : lexical, syntactic, semantic and polarity features. Our system achieves very high performance in both subtasks of binary and multi-class irony detection in tweets. In particular, we rank at least fourth using the accuracy metric and sixth using the F1 metric. Our code is available at :https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter\n      ', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام NIHRIO الخاص بنا لمهمة SemEval-2018 3 "اكتشاف السخرية في التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية." نقترح استخدام بنية شبكة عصبية بسيطة لـ Multilayer Perceptron مع أنواع مختلفة من ميزات الإدخال بما في ذلك: الميزات المعجمية والنحوية والدلالية والقطبية. يحقق نظامنا أداءً عاليًا للغاية في كل من المهام الفرعية للكشف عن المفارقة الثنائية والمتعددة الطبقات في التغريدات. على وجه الخصوص ، نحتل المرتبة الرابعة على الأقل باستخدام مقياس الدقة والسادس باستخدام مقياس F1. الكود الخاص بنا متاح على: <https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter>', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema NIHRIO para a Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2018 “Detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês”. Propomos usar uma arquitetura de rede neural simples do Multilayer Perceptron com vários tipos de recursos de entrada, incluindo: recursos léxicos, sintáticos, semânticos e de polaridade. Nosso sistema alcança um desempenho muito alto em ambas as subtarefas de detecção de ironia binária e multiclasse em tweets. Em particular, classificamos pelo menos o quarto lugar usando a métrica de precisão e o sexto usando a métrica F1. Nosso código está disponível em: <https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter>', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système NIHRIO pour SEMEVAL-2018 Task 3 «\xa0Détection de l'ironie dans les tweets anglais\xa0». Nous proposons d'utiliser une architecture de réseau neuronal simple de Perceptron multicouche avec différents types de caractéristiques d'entrée, notamment\xa0: caractéristiques lexicales, syntaxiques, sémantiques et de polarité. Notre système atteint de très hautes performances à la fois dans les sous-tâches de détection d'ironie binaire et multiclasse dans les tweets. En particulier, nous nous classons au moins en quatrième position en utilisant la métrique de précision et en sixième en utilisant la métrique F1. Notre code est disponible à l'adresse suivante\xa0: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro sistema NIHRIO para la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018 «Detección de ironía en tuits en inglés». Proponemos utilizar una arquitectura de red neuronal simple de Perceptrón Multicapa con varios tipos de funciones de entrada que incluyen: características léxicas, sintácticas, semánticas y de polaridad. Nuestro sistema logra un rendimiento muy alto tanto en las subtareas de detección de ironía binaria como de múltiples clases en los tweets. En particular, ocupamos al menos el cuarto lugar con la métrica de precisión y el sexto con la métrica F1. Nuestro código está disponible en: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval -2018タスク3「英語のツイートにおけるイロニー検出」のためのNIHRIOシステムについて説明します。「私たちは、マルチレイヤーパーセプトロンのシンプルなニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを使用し、語彙、構文、セマンティック、および極性機能を含むさまざまなタイプの入力機能を使用することを提案します。当社のシステムは、ツイートでのバイナリ検出とマルチクラスの皮肉検出の両方のサブタスクで非常に高いパフォーマンスを実現します。特に、精度メトリックを使用して少なくとも4位にランクインし、F 1メトリックを使用して6位にランクインします。コードは以下で入手できます。 <https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter>', 'zh': '本文述NIHRIO系统,施于SemEval-2018务3"英语推文中讽刺性检测"。 臣等议用重感知器之简神经网络架构,有各种类型输特征,曰词法,句法,语义,曰极性。 系乎推文之二进制,刺检之任,皆得至性。 特用准确性指标至少第四,用 F1 指标第六。 吾代码在<https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter>', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 टास्क 3 "अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाने" के लिए हमारे NIHRIO सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है। हम सहित इनपुट सुविधाओं के विभिन्न प्रकार के साथ Multilayer Perceptron के एक सरल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क वास्तुकला का उपयोग करने का प्रस्ताव: लेक्सिकल, वाक्यात्मक, शब्दार्थ और polarity सुविधाओं. हमारी प्रणाली दोनों द्विआधारी और बहु वर्ग विडंबना का पता लगाने के subtasks में tweets में बहुत उच्च प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है. विशेष रूप से, हम सटीकता मीट्रिक का उपयोग करके कम से कम चौथे स्थान पर हैं और F1 मीट्रिक का उपयोग करके छठे स्थान पर हैं। हमारा कोड पर उपलब्ध है: <https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter>', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система NIHRIO для задачи 3 SemEval-2018 «Обнаружение иронии в твитах на английском языке.« Мы предлагаем использовать простую нейронную сетевую архитектуру Многослойного перцептрона с различными типами входных признаков, включая: лексические, синтаксические, семантические и полярные признаки. Наша система достигает очень высокой производительности как в подзадачах двоичного, так и многоклассового обнаружения иронии в твитах. В частности, мы занимаем как минимум четвертое место по метрике точности и шестое - по метрике F1. Наш код доступен по адресу: <https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter>', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras NIHRIO le haghaidh Tasc 3 SemEval-2018 “Brath íoróin i tweets Béarla.” Tá sé beartaithe againn ailtireacht líonra néarúil simplí de Perceptron Ilchiseal a úsáid le cineálacha éagsúla gnéithe ionchuir lena n-áirítear: gnéithe foclóireachta, comhréire, séimeantach agus polaraíochta. Baineann ár gcóras feidhmíocht an-ard amach sa dá fhothasc de bhrath íoróin dhénártha agus ilranga i dtvuíteanna. Go háirithe, táimid sa cheathrú háit ar a laghad ag baint úsáide as an méadrach cruinnis agus sa séú háit ag baint úsáide as an méadrach F1. Tá ár gcód ar fáil ag: <https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter>', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja NIHRIO rendszerünket a SemEval-2018 feladat 3 "Irónia felismerése angol tweetekben". Javasoljuk, hogy a Multilayer Perceptron egyszerű neurális hálózati architektúráját használjuk különböző típusú bemeneti funkciókkal, beleértve: lexikai, szintaktikai, szemantikai és polaritási jellemzőket. Rendszerünk nagyon magas teljesítményt ér el mind a bináris, mind a több osztályú irónia felismerésében tweetekben. Különösen a pontossági mutató alapján legalább a negyedik, az F1 mutató alapján pedig a hatodik. Kódunk a következő címen érhető el: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი NIHRIO სისტემის SemEval-2018 დავალების სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო \'ინგლისური ტივიტებში აღმოჩენა იპრონია.\'" ჩვენ გვეძლევა გამოიყენოთ მრავალური პერსტეპონის განსხვავებული გეგმარების განსხვავებული ფუნქციების განსხვავება: ლექსიკალური, სინტაქტიური, სიმენტიკური და პოლარიტიურ ჩვენი სისტემა ძალიან დიდი გამოსახულებულია ორივე ბინარიური და მრავალკლასიური თრონიის განახულებაში. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ მინუს მეოთხედი მეტრიკის გამოყენება და მექვსი F1 მეტრიკის გამოყენება. ჩვენი კოდის შესაძლებელია: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema NIHRIO per SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Rilevamento dell'ironia nei tweet inglesi.' Proponiamo di utilizzare una semplice architettura di rete neurale di Multilayer Perceptron con vari tipi di funzionalità di input tra cui: funzionalità lessicali, sintattiche, semantiche e polarità. Il nostro sistema raggiunge prestazioni molto elevate in entrambe le sottoattività di rilevamento binario e multi-classe ironia nei tweet. In particolare, ci classifichiamo almeno quarto utilizzando la metrica di precisione e sesto utilizzando la metrica F1. Il nostro codice è disponibile all'indirizzo: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας για την εργασία 3 "Ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα αγγλικά tweets". Προτείνουμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε μια απλή αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικού δικτύου πολυστρωματικού με διάφορους τύπους χαρακτηριστικών εισόδου συμπεριλαμβανομένων: λεξικών, συντακτικών, σημασιολογικών και πολικών χαρακτηριστικών. Το σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει πολύ υψηλές επιδόσεις και στις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες της διττής και πολυκλασσικής ανίχνευσης ειρωνείας στα tweets. Συγκεκριμένα, κατατάσσουμε τουλάχιστον τέταρτο χρησιμοποιώντας τη μετρική ακρίβειας και έκτο χρησιμοποιώντας τη μετρική F1. Ο κωδικός μας είναι διαθέσιμος στο: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'lt': "This paper describes our NIHRIO system for SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets.'  Mes siūlome naudoti paprastą daugiasluoksnio Perceptrono neurologinio tinklo architektūrą su įvairių tipų įvedimo savybėmis, įskaitant: leksikines, sintaktines, semantines ir poliarines savybes. Mūsų sistema pasiekia labai didelius rezultatus dviejų ir daugiakalassių ironijos aptikimo tweetuose subtaskuose. Visų pirma mes klasifikuojame bent ketvirtą pagal tikslumo metriją ir šeštą pagal F1 metriją. Mūsų kodas pateikiamas: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'mk': "This paper describes our NIHRIO system for SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets.'  Ние предложуваме да се користи едноставна нервна мрежна архитектура на Мултислоевен Перцептон со различни видови на вводни карактеристики вклучувајќи: лексички, синтактички, семантички и поларитетски карактеристики. Our system achieves very high performance in both subtasks of binary and multi-class irony detection in tweets.  Особено, ние се рангираме најмалку четврто користејќи ја метричката точност и шестата користејќи ја метричката F1. Нашиот код е достапен на: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 3 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഐറോണി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ NIHRIO സിസ്റ് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ നെറുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റാള്\u200d സെക്ട്രോണിന്റെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടേര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത തര Our system achieves very high performance in both subtasks of binary and multi-class irony detection in tweets.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, F1 മെട്രിക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കുറഞ്ഞത് നാലാമത്തേതായി നില്\u200dക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ കോഡ് ലഭ്യമല്ല: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'kk': "Бұл қағаз біздің semiEval-2018 тапсырманың NIHRIO жүйесімізді 'Англис tweets тізімінде ирония анықтау' дегенді таңдайды. Біз көп қабатты келтіру мүмкіндіктерінің қарапайым неврал желінің архитектурасын қолдануға ұсынамыз: лексикалық, синтактикалық, semantiк және поляритық мүмкіндіктері. Біздің жүйеміз бинарлық және көп класс ирониялық табуларының екеуінде өте жоғары әсер етеді. Әрине біз кемінде төртінші ретінде F1 метрикалық метрикалық және алтынші ретінде төртінші ретінде сақтаймыз. Біздің кодіміз бар: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem NIHRIO kami untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 3 'Pengesanan ironi dalam tweet Inggeris.' Kami cadangkan untuk menggunakan arkitektur rangkaian saraf sederhana Perceptron Multilayer dengan berbagai jenis ciri input termasuk: ciri-ciri leksikal, sintaktik, semantik dan polariti. Our system achieves very high performance in both subtasks of binary and multi-class irony detection in tweets.  Secara khususnya, kita mengira sekurang-kurangnya keempat menggunakan metrik akurat dan keenam menggunakan metrik F1. Kod kami tersedia di: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний НИХРИО системийг SemEval-2018 даалгаварын 3-р "Англи tweets дээр газрын тодорхойлолт" гэдгийг тайлбарладаг. Бид олон давхар Perceptron-ын энгийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурыг ашиглах боломжтой санал өгдөг: лексик, синтактик, semantic болон зайлшгүй байдал. Бидний систем tweets дээр хоёр давхар, олон ангийнхаа гайхамшигтай байдлын тухай маш өндөр ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Ялангуяа бид хамгийн багахан дөрвөн хэмжээнд F1 метрийг ашиглан зөв метрик болон зургаан хэмжээгээр багтана. Бидний код бол: https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna NIHRIO għas-SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets.' We propose to use a simple neural network architecture of Multilayer Perceptron with various types of input features including: lexical, syntactic, semantic and polarity features.  Is-sistema tagħna tikseb prestazzjoni għolja ħafna kemm f’sotto-mistoqsijiet ta’ detezzjoni ta’ ironija binarja kif ukoll f’diversi klassijiet fit-tweets. B’mod partikolari, aħna nikklassifikaw mill-inqas ir-raba’ bl-użu tal-metrika tal-preċiżjoni u s-sitt bl-użu tal-metrika F1. Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa disponibbli fuq: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system NIHRIO dla SemEval-2018 Task 3 "Wykrywanie ironii w angielskich tweetach". Proponujemy zastosowanie prostej architektury sieci neuronowej wielowarstwowego Perceptrona z różnymi typami cech wejściowych, w tym: leksykalnych, składniczych, semantycznych i polarystycznych. Nasz system osiąga bardzo wysoką wydajność zarówno w podzadaniach wykrywania ironii binarnej, jak i wieloklasjowej w tweetach. W szczególności zaliczamy co najmniej czwartą pozycję przy użyciu wskaźnika dokładności i szóstą przy użyciu wskaźnika F1. Nasz kod dostępny jest pod adresem: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'sr': "Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem NIHRIO za pola Evala-2018 zadatak 3 'Ironijska detekcija na engleskim tweetima'. Predlažemo da koristimo jednostavnu neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu Multilayer Perceptron sa različitim vrstama ulaznih karakteristika uključujući: leksičke, sintaktične, semantične i polarne karakteristike. Naš sistem postiže veoma visoke funkcije u podpakama binarne i multiklasne ironičke detekcije u tweetima. Posebno, mi rankiramo najmanje četvrti koristeći preciznost metrika i šesti koristeći F1 metriku. Naš kod je dostupan na: https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter - Да.", 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru NIHRIO pentru SemEval-2018 Task 3 "Detectarea ironiei în tweeturile în limba engleză". Vă propunem să utilizați o arhitectură simplă de rețea neurală a Perceptron Multilayer cu diferite tipuri de caracteristici de intrare, inclusiv: caracteristici lexicale, sintactice, semantice și polaritate. Sistemul nostru obține performanțe foarte ridicate în ambele subsarcini ale detectării ironiei binare și multi-clase în tweets. În special, clasamentul nostru este cel puțin al patrulea folosind metrica de precizie și al șaselea folosind metrica F1. Codul nostru este disponibil la: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka NIHRIO ee SemEval-2018 Shaqada 3 'Garashada ajaaniga' oo ku qoran Tweetka Ingiriiska. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa in aan isticmaalno xarunta shabakadda neurada ee Multilayer Perceptron oo ay leeyihiin noocyo kala duduwan oo input ah, kuwaas oo ah: lexical, syntactic, semantic iyo polarity. nidaamkayagu wuxuu si aad u dheer u helaa shaqooyin labaad oo la soo ogaado fudud labaad iyo fasalka kala duduwan ee Tweetka. Si gaar ah, ugu yaraan afraad waxaynu ku sarraynaa isticmaalka F1 metric. Aqoontayada waxaa laga helaa: https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt NIHRIO-system för SemEval-2018 Task 3 "Irony detection in English tweets". Vi föreslår att använda en enkel neural nätverksarkitektur av Multilayer Perceptron med olika typer av inmatningsfunktioner inklusive: lexikala, syntaktiska, semantiska och polaritetsfunktioner. Vårt system uppnår mycket hög prestanda i både underaktiviteter av binär och multi-class ironi detektering i tweets. I synnerhet rankas vi minst fyra med hjälp av noggrannhetsmätaren och sjätte med hjälp av F1-mätaren. Vår kod finns tillgänglig på: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'ta': "இந்த தாள் SemEval-2018 செயல் 3 'ஐரோனி கண்டுபிடிப்பு ஆங்கிலத்தின் தொடர்புகளில்' என்று எங்கள் NIHRIO அமைப்பை விவரிக்கி We propose to use a simple neural network architecture of Multilayer Perceptron with various types of input features including: lexical, syntactic, semantic and polarity features.  இருநிலை மற்றும் பல வகுப்பு irony கண்டுபிடிப்பு இருந்த துணை பணிகளில் மிகவும் உயர்ந்த செயல்பாடு பெறுகிறது. F1 மீட்ரிக்கை பயன்படுத்தி சரியான மெட்ரிக் மற்றும் ஆறு முறை பயன்படுத்தி குறைந்தது நான்காவது நிறம். எங்கள் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும்: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ අපේ NIHRIO පද්ධතිය සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩක් 3 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් වල අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න'. අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විවිධ වර්ගයක් තියෙන සාමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයූරල් ජාල සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න: ලෙක්සික්, ස අපේ පද්ධතිය ගොඩක් උත්සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා බායිනාරි සහ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ට්විට් වලින් වි විශේෂයෙන්, අපි අඩුම හතරවෙනි මෙට්\u200dරික් සහ F1 මෙට්\u200dරික් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අපේ කෝඩ් එක පුළුවන්: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'ur': "یہ کاغذ ہمارے نیھریو سیسٹم کو SemEval-2018 ٹاکس 3 کے لئے بیان کرتا ہے 'انگلیسی ٹویٹوں میں ایرونی شناسایی'. ہم ایک ساده نئورل نیٹ ورک ایکسٹرون کے استعمال کرنے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ملتی لائر پرسپٹرون کے مختلف طریقے اینٹ فوکیلوں کے ساتھ استعمال کریں، شامل ہوتے ہیں: لکسیکل، سینٹکتیک، سیمنٹیکل اور سلولی فوکی ہمارا سیستم ٹویٹوں میں بہت اچھی فعالیت حاصل کرتا ہے جو دوئناری اور بہت سی کلاس کی آزمائش میں ہے۔ مخصوصا، ہم حد سے زیادہ چوتھا درجہ پر صحیح متریک اور چھٹا درجہ F1 متریک کے مطابق رکھتے ہیں. ہمارا کیڈ موجود ہے: https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår NIHRIO-systemet for semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3 « Irony Detection in English tweets ». Vi foreslår å bruka ein enkel neuralnettverk- arkitektur av fleire lag- prosentron med ulike typar inndata- funksjonar, inkludert: leksiske, syntaktiske, semantiske og polaritetsfunksjonar. Systemet vårt oppnår svært høg utvikling i både underoppslag av binær og fleirklasse ironisk oppdaging i tweets. I særskilt rankerer vi minst fjerde med nøyaktigheten metrisk og sekste med F1-metrisk. Koden vårt er tilgjengeleg på: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống NIgiải của chúng ta cho nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 "Phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter." Chúng tôi đề nghị sử dụng một cấu trúc dây thần kinh đơn giản của tỷ lệ đa lớp có các tính năng nhập khác nhau bao gồm: tính năng ngôn ngữ, pháp thuật, ngữ pháp và các tính to án khác nhau. Hệ thống của chúng ta đạt được hiệu suất rất cao cả trong việc phát hiện âm nhị phân và đa hạng trớ trêu trên Twitter. Chúng tôi xếp hạng ít nhất là thứ tư dùng hệ thống đo chính xác và thứ sáu dùng hệ thống đo lường F1. Mật mã của chúng tôi có sẵn ở: https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter Language', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval-2018 Vazifa 3 'Iron qidirish' ingliz tweetidagi NIHRIO tizimini anglatadi. Biz Multilayer Perceptron uchun oddiy neyrol tarmoqni ishlatishni tahlil qilamiz va har xil turlar kiritish imkoniyatlari bilan bir nechta tarmoqni qo'shish imkoniyatlaridan foydalanamiz: leksikal, syntactik, semantik va polarilik xususiyatlari. Bizning tizimimiz Twitterda ikkita va ko'plab sinfning ko'plab kechilik jarayonlarida juda ko'proq bajarishni amalga oshadi. Ko'pchilik, biz F1 metrik yordamida aniqlangan metrik va 6 marta darajada ko'pchilik. Kodlash usuli: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата система за задача 3 "Откриване на ирония в английски туитове". Предлагаме да се използва проста архитектура на невронната мрежа на Многослойния Перцептрон с различни видове входни функции, включително: лексикални, синтактични, семантични и полярни характеристики. Нашата система постига много висока производителност както при подзадачите за бинарно, така и при многокласно откриване на ирония в туитове. По-специално, ние се класираме най-малко четвърто, използвайки метрика за точност и шесто, използвайки метрика F1. Нашият код е достъпен на: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'nl': "Dit artikel beschrijft ons NIHRIO systeem voor SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Ironie detection in English tweets'. We stellen voor om een eenvoudige neurale netwerkarchitectuur van Multilayer Perceptron te gebruiken met verschillende soorten invoerfuncties, waaronder: lexicale, syntactische, semantische en polariteitskenmerken. Ons systeem bereikt zeer hoge prestaties in zowel subtaken van binaire als multi-class irony detectie in tweets. Met name rangschikken we op zijn minst vierde met behulp van de nauwkeurigheidsmetrik en zesde met behulp van de F1-metriek. Onze code is beschikbaar op: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'de': "Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser NIHRIO-System für SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Ironie detection in English tweets'. Wir schlagen vor, eine einfache neuronale Netzwerkarchitektur von Multilayer Perceptron mit verschiedenen Arten von Eingabefunktionen zu verwenden, einschließlich: lexikalische, syntaktische, semantische und polaritätsmerkmale. Unser System erreicht sowohl in Teilaufgaben der binären als auch der mehrstufigen Ironie-Erkennung in Tweets eine sehr hohe Leistung. Insbesondere rangieren wir mit der Genauigkeitsmetrik mindestens viert und mit der F1-Metrik sechst. Unser Code ist verfügbar unter: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'hr': "Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem NIHRIO za pola evaluacije 2018. zadatak 3 'Ironijska otkrića na engleskim tweetima.' Predlažemo koristiti jednostavnu neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu Multilayer Perceptron a s različitim vrstama ulaznih karakteristika uključujući: leksičke, sintaktične, semantične i polarne karakteristike. Naš sustav postiže vrlo visok učinkovitost u podstavama binarnog i multiklasnog ironičkog otkrića u tweetima. Posebno, činimo najmanje četvrti korištenjem preciznosti metrika i šesti korištenjem F1 metrika. Naš kod je dostupan na: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver vores NIHRIO-system til SemEval-2018 Opgave 3 'Irony detection in English tweets.' Vi foreslår at bruge en simpel neural netværksarkitektur af Multilayer Perceptron med forskellige typer af input funktioner, herunder: leksikske, syntaktiske, semantiske og polaritetsfunktioner. Vores system opnår meget høj ydeevne i både underopgaver af binær og multi-klasse ironi detektering i tweets. Især rangerer vi mindst fjerde ved hjælp af nøjagtighedsmålet og sjette ved hjælp af F1-metrikken. Vores kode er tilgængelig på: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'ko': "본고는SemEval-18퀘스트3'영어 트윗에서의 반어 검측'에 대한NIHRIO시스템을 묘사한다우리는 간단한 다중 감지기 신경 네트워크 구조를 사용하여 각종 유형의 입력 특징을 가지는데 그것이 바로 어휘, 문법, 의미와 극성 특징을 포함한다.우리 시스템은 트위터의 2진법과 여러 종류의 풍자 탐지 서브 임무에서 모두 높은 성능을 얻었다.특히 정밀도 지표를 사용해 최소 4위, F1 지표를 사용해 6위를 차지했다.Dell 코드는 다음과 같습니다. <https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter>", 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم NIHRIO ما را برای کار سوم Eval-2018 توضیح می\u200cدهد که در تویت\u200cهای انگلیسی شناسایی آهنی است. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از یک معماری شبکه عصبی ساده از پرسپترون متعدد لایه\u200cها استفاده کنیم با مختلف نوع ویژه\u200cهای ورودی شامل: ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی، سنتاکتیک، semantic و polarity. سیستم ما در هر دو قسمت آزمایش مسخره\u200cهای بینایی و کلاس\u200cهای زیادی در توئیت بسیار بالا می\u200cرسد. مخصوصا، ما حداقل چهارم را با استفاده از دقیق متریک و ششمین از استفاده از متریک F1 درجه می\u200cگیریم. کد ما در: https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem NIHRIO kami untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 3 'Deteksi ironi dalam tweet Inggris.' Kami mengusulkan untuk menggunakan arsitektur jaringan saraf sederhana Multilayer Perceptron dengan berbagai jenis fitur masukan termasuk: akses, sintaksi, semantis dan polaritas fitur. Sistem kita mencapai prestasi yang sangat tinggi dalam kedua subtasks dari deteksi ironi binari dan multi-kelas dalam tweet. Terutama, kita mengikuti peringkat setidaknya keempat menggunakan metrik akurasi dan keenam menggunakan metrik F1. Kode kami tersedia di: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'tr': "Bu kagyz biziň NIHRIO sistemamyzy SemEval-2018 Taýgy üçin 'Iňlisçe tweetlerde kirli tanyş'. Biz birnäçe gaty karakterler bilen basit nuýral a ýry arhitekturlygyny ulanmagy teklip edip görýäris: leksik, syntaktik, semantik we polaritlik karakterleriň içine. Biziň sistemamyz tweets içinde ikinji we multi-klas aýyrlygyny tanyşdyrmak üçin örän ýokary ukyplygy başarýar. Aýratyn bilen, biz iň azyndan dördünji metriýa we altyny F1 metriýa ulanýarys. Biziň kodymyz: https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu wa NIHRIO wa SemEval-2018 Kazi 3 'Ugunduzi wa Ujerumani katika twiti za Kiingereza.' We propose to use a simple neural network architecture of Multilayer Perceptron with various types of input features including: lexical, syntactic, semantic and polarity features.  Mfumo wetu unapata ufanisi mkubwa katika kazi zote za uchunguzi wa kejeli binafsi na darasa nyingi katika twiti. Kwa hakika, tuna rangi ya nne kwa kutumia mita ya sahihi na sita kwa kutumia mita ya F1. Utawala wetu unapatikana kwa: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የሴmEval-2018 ስራ በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች የኢራኒ አግኝቷል የሚለውን የNIHRIO ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ የብልደረጃ ፕሬስፕሮን የናውሬል መረብ መሠረት በተለየ ዓይነቶች የጥያቄ ምርጫዎች፣ ሌክሲካዊ፣ ሲንተቲክ፣ የsemantic እና የፖርቲካዊ ምርጫዎችን እና ለመጠቀም እናስባለን፡፡ Our system achieves very high performance in both subtasks of binary and multi-class irony detection in tweets.  በተለይም የF1 ሚትሪክ በመጠቀም በአንዳንዱ አራተኛ ማዕበል እናደርጋለን፡፡ ኮዱን በ: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'sq': "Ky artikull përshkruan sistemin tonë NIHRIO për SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Detection of Irony in English tweets.' Ne propozojmë të përdorim një arkitekturë të thjeshtë rrjeti nervor të Multilayer Perceptron me lloje të ndryshme elementesh të hyrjes duke përfshirë: elemente lexike, sintaktike, semantike dhe polariteti. Sistemi ynë arrin performancë shumë të lartë në të dy nëndetyrat e zbulimit të ironisë binare dhe shumë klase në tweet. In particular, we rank at least fourth using the accuracy metric and sixth using the F1 metric.  Kodi ynë është në dispozicion në: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons NIHRIO stelsel vir SemEval-2018 Taak 3 'Irony beskrywing in Engels tweets'. Ons voorstel om 'n eenvoudige neuralnetwerk arkitektuur van Multilayer Perceptron te gebruik met verskillende tipes invoer funksies insluitend: leksiese, sintaksiese, semantiese en polarisie funksies. Ons stelsel bereik baie hoë prestasie in beide subaske van binêre en multiklas ironie-beskrywing in tweets. Spesifieke, ons rank ten minste vierde met die presisiteit metrie en sesde met die F1 metrie. Ons kode is beskikbaar by: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ՆիՀRIO համակարգը "ՍեմԷվալ-2018" 3-րդ հանձնարարության "Իրոնիայի հայտնաբերումը անգլերեն թվիթերում": Մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել բազմաշերտ Պերցեպտոնի պարզ նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետությունը, որն ունի տարբեր տեսակի ներմուծքային հատկություններ, ներառյալ՝ լեքսիկական, սինտակտիկ, սեմանտիկ և բնակչություն: Our system achieves very high performance in both subtasks of binary and multi-class irony detection in tweets.  Մենք հատկապես դասակարգում ենք առնվազն չորրորդը՝ օգտագործելով ճշգրիտության մետրիկը և վեցերորդը՝ օգտագործելով F1 մետրիկը: Մեր կոդը հասանելի է: https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter _', 'bn': "এই পত্রিকা আমাদের এনআইএইচরিও ব্যবস্থার ব্যাখ্যা করছে সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩ 'ইংরেজী টুইটে আইরোনি আবিষ্কার করা হয়েছে। আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি মাল্টিলার পার্সেপ্ট্রোনের একটি সাধারণ নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো ব্যবহার করতে যার মধ্যে বিভিন্ন ধরনের ইনপুট বৈশিষ্ট্য রয়েছে: লেক টুইটে আমাদের সিস্টেম বাইনারি এবং বহুক্লাসের বিদ্রুপ পরিচালনার দুটিতে খুব বেশী প্রভাব পেয়েছে। In particular, we rank at least fourth using the accuracy metric and sixth using the F1 metric.  আমাদের কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'az': "Bu kağıt bizim NIHRIO sistemimizi SemEval-2018 Görevi 3 'İngilizce tweetlərdə Ironik keşfetməsi' ilə tanıyır. Biz çoxlu səviyyə müxtəlif giriş fəaliyyətləri ilə çoxlu səviyyənin basit nöral a ğ arhitektürünü istifadə etməyi təklif edirik: leksik, sintaktik, semantik və polaritə fəaliyyətləri. Sistemimiz tweets içində ikili və çoxlu sınıf ironi keşfetməsində çox yüksək performanslığı yetişir. Özellikle, biz ən az dördüncü metrik və altıncısı F1 metrik vasitəsilə dördüncü dərəcə veririk. Bizim kodumuz: https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem NIHRIO za pola Evala-2018 zadatak 3 'detekcija željeza na engleskim tweetima.' Predlažemo da koristimo jednostavnu neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu Multilayer Perceptron sa različitim vrstama ulaznih karakteristika uključujući: leksičke, sintaktične, semantične i polarne karakteristike. Naš sistem postiže vrlo visok učinkovitost u podsekama binarnog i multiklasnog ironičkog otkrića u tweetima. Posebno, mi rankiramo najmanje četvrti koristeći preciznost metrika i šesti koristeći F1 metriku. Naš kod je dostupan na: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter -Da.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie NIHRIO süsteemi SemEval-2018 ülesande 3 jaoks "Irony detection in English tweets". Me teeme ettepaneku kasutada lihtsat mitmekihilise Perceptroni neurovõrgu arhitektuuri erinevate sisendfunktsioonidega, sealhulgas leksikaalsete, süntaktiliste, semantiliste ja polaarsusfunktsioonidega. Meie süsteem saavutab väga kõrge jõudluse nii binaarse kui ka mitmeklassilise iroonia tuvastamise alamülesannetes säutsides. Täpsusmõõdiku kasutades oleme vähemalt neljandal kohal ja F1 mõõdiku kasutades kuuendal kohal. Meie kood on kättesaadav aadressil: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'cs': "Tento článek popisuje náš systém NIHRIO pro SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Detekce ironie v anglických tweetech'. Navrhujeme využít jednoduchou neuronovou síťovou architekturu vícevrstvého Perceptronu s různými typy vstupních vlastností včetně lexikálních, syntaktických, sémantických a polaritních vlastností. Náš systém dosahuje velmi vysokého výkonu jak v dílčích úkolech binární, tak i vícetřídní detekce ironie ve tweetech. Zejména pořadíme nejméně čtvrté pomocí metriky přesnosti a šesté pomocí metriky F1. Náš kód je k dispozici na: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan NIHRIO-järjestelmäämme SemEval-2018 Task 3 "Irony detection in English tweets". Ehdotamme monikerroksisen Perceptronin yksinkertaisen neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurin käyttämistä erilaisilla syöttöominaisuuksilla, kuten leksikaalisilla, syntaktisilla, semanttisilla ja polariteettiominaisuuksilla. Järjestelmämme saavuttaa erittäin korkean suorituskyvyn sekä binäärisen että moniluokan ironian tunnistamisen alatehtävissä tweeteissä. Erityisesti olemme sijoittuneet vähintään neljänneksi tarkkuusmittarilla ja kuudenneksi F1-metrillä. Koodimme on saatavilla osoitteessa: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'ca': "This paper describes our NIHRIO system for SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets.'  Proposem que utilitzi una arquitectura simple de xarxa neural del Perceptre Multicapa amb diversos tipus de característiques d'entrada, incloent: característiques lècsiques, sinàctiques, semàntiques i polars. El nostre sistema aconsegueix un rendiment molt alt en ambdues subtaskes de detecció d'ironia binaria i multiclasse en tweets. En particular, ens classifiquem al menys al quart fent servir la metèrica de precisió i el sexte fent servir la metèrica F1. Our code is available at: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš NIHRIO sistem za nalogo 3 SemEval-2018 "Zaznavanje ironije v angleških tweetih". Predlagamo uporabo preproste arhitekture nevronskega omrežja Multilayer Perceptron z različnimi vrstami vhodnih funkcij, vključno z leksikalnimi, sintaktičnimi, semantičnimi in polarnostnimi funkcijami. Naš sistem zagotavlja zelo visoko zmogljivost pri podnalogah binarnega in večrazrednega zaznavanja ironije v tweetih. Zlasti smo uvrščeni na vsaj četrto mesto pri meritvi natančnosti in šesto pri meritvi F1. Naša koda je na voljo na: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana na tsarin NIHRO na SemEV-2018 Tafiyar 3 'Aburin Iron cikin littattafani na Ingiriya.' Tunamaɗa mu yi amfani da matsakan jerin neural na mutane na Perceptron da wasu irin tsari masu shiga, kamar: leksisi, syntactic, semantic and Polarity. Ubuntjinmu na sãmu mafiya girma a cikin aikin da za'a gane ni'imar sauri da jama'a biyu. A cikin ƙayyade, za'a yi amfani da metric na taƙaita, ko kuma a rage rubutu, da amfani da F1 metric. @ info: whatsthis https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'he': "This paper describes our NIHRIO system for SemEval-2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets.'  אנו מציעים להשתמש בארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית פשוטה של פרספקטרון ממספר שכבות עם סוגים שונים של תכונות הכניסה כולל: תכונות לקסיות, סינטקטיות, סמנטיות וקוטריות. Our system achieves very high performance in both subtasks of binary and multi-class irony detection in tweets.  In particular, we rank at least fourth using the accuracy metric and sixth using the F1 metric.  הקוד שלנו זמין ב: < https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'jv': "Ngerti wigatining barêng nggambar NIHRIO sistem kanggo semebal-2008 task 3 'Ketokakno Iwakuni nang tuwit Inggris.` We proposal to use a Simple Neral network architecture of Multilayer Percepron with Variable types of input parameters include: lexcal, formataction, semanti and polarity settings. Sistem awak dhéwé éntuk akeh pisan neng akeh operasi iki dadi binharé karo akeh multi-klas ditambah nyelarane kuwi tiket. Genjer-Genjer Coverage https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >", 'bo': 'ཤོག We propose to use a simple neural network architecture of Multilayer Perceptron with various types of input features including: lexical, syntactic, semantic and polarity features. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་ཟུར་བ་དང་ཕྱོགས་སྣ་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་མཐུན་སྣ་ཚོགས་རྣམས་མཐུན་མང་ཤོས་ཐུབ་པ་རེད། དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་F1་ལས་མཐུན་སྤྱོད་པའི་accuracy metric ་དང་འཐའ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་ཆུང་ཉུང་མཐའ་བཞི་པ་གྲངས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་རྟགས་འདི: <ནང་གི་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/NIHRIO/IronyDetectionInTwitter >'}
{'en': 'LDR at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'ar': 'LDR في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: تمثيل نصي منخفض الأبعاد لاكتشاف المفارقة', 'fr': "LDR au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Une représentation textuelle de faible dimension pour la détection de l'ironie", 'es': 'LDR en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Una representación de texto de baja dimensión para la detección de ironía', 'ja': 'LDR at SemEval -2018 Task 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'pt': 'LDR na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Uma representação de texto de baixa dimensão para detecção de ironia', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर LDR: विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए एक कम आयामी पाठ प्रतिनिधित्व', 'ru': 'LDR на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Низкоразмерное текстовое представление для обнаружения иронии', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务3LDR:刺检维文本', 'ga': 'LDR ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Léiriú Téacs Íseal Toiseach le haghaidh Braite Iarainn', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Μια αναπαράσταση κειμένου χαμηλής διάστασης για την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας', 'ka': 'LDR semiEval-2018 დავალება 3: დაბალი განზომილებული ტექსტის გამოსახულება', 'hu': 'LDR a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Alacsony dimenziós szövegreprezentáció az irónia felismeréséhez', 'mk': 'LDR на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Мала димензионална претстава на текст за идентификација на иронија', 'it': "LDR a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Una rappresentazione del testo a bassa dimensione per il rilevamento dell'ironia", 'kk': 'LDR 30- 2018 тапсырмасында 3- тапсырма: Төмен өлшемі мәтін тапсырмасы', 'lt': 'LDR per 2018 m. pusmetį 3 užduotis: mažo matmens teksto atstovavimas ironijai aptikti', 'ms': 'LDR pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Perwakilan Teks Dimensi rendah untuk Pengesanan Ironi', 'mn': 'LDR at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3: ഇറോണി ഡിറ്ററിനുള്ള ഒരു കുറഞ്ഞ ഡിമെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധി', 'no': 'LDR ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: ein låg dimensjonal tekst- representasjon for Irony Detection', 'ro': 'LDR la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: O reprezentare a textului cu dimensiuni reduse pentru detectarea ironiei', 'sr': 'LDR na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: niska dimenzionalna predstavljanja teksta za detekciju željeza', 'mt': 'LDR f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 3: Rappreżentazzjoni tat-Test b’Dimensjoni Baxxa għad-Detezzjoni tal-Ironja', 'pl': 'LDR w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Niskowymiarowa reprezentacja tekstu do wykrywania ironii', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 3: ஒரு குறைந்த இலவச உரை காட்சியை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான குறைந்தது', 'ur': 'آلڈر ۲۰۱۸ ٹاکس ۳ میں ایک کم اندازے کی متن معرفی', 'si': 'LDR at semeval-2018 Job 3: A low size text reposition for Ironic Detection', 'so': 'LDR at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Ironium', 'sv': 'LDR på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: En låg dimensionell textrepresentation för Irony Detection', 'uz': 'Eval- 2018 Vazifa 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Iron Detection', 'vi': 'Comment=Vẽ biếm hoạ với phát hiện âm thanhName Name', 'da': 'LDR ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: En lavdimensionel tekstrepræsentation til registrering af ironi', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Ниско измерение на текстово представяне за откриване на ирония', 'hr': 'LDR na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 3: Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'nl': 'LDR bij SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Een lage dimensionale tekst representatie voor ironie detectie', 'de': 'LDR bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Eine niederdimensionale Textdarstellung zur Ironie Detektion', 'ko': 'SemEval-2018의 LDR 작업 3: 역설적으로 감지된 저차원 텍스트 표시', 'fa': 'LDR در دستور نیم Eval-2018 Task 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'id': 'LDR di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Perwakilan Teks Dimensional rendah untuk Deteksi Ironi', 'sw': 'LDR kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Mahakilisho ya Maandishi ya Kimengi ya Kuchungua Uholanzi', 'af': "LDR by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 3: ' n Lae Dimensionale Teks Voorstelling vir Irony Deteksie", 'sq': 'LDR në SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'tr': 'LDR at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'hy': 'ԼԴՌ-ը 2018 թվականի կիսաչափության 3. հանձնարարությունն է. թեքչափ տեքստի ներկայացումը', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Ironic Detection', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ৩: আইরোনি সনাক্তির জন্য একটি কম ডিমেন্সিয়াল লেখা প্রতিনিধি', 'az': 'LDR at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'bs': 'LDR na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 3: Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'ca': 'LDR a SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection', 'et': 'LDR SemEval-2018 ülesanne 3: madalamõõtmeline teksti esindus iroonia tuvastamiseks', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Nízkorozměrná reprezentace textu pro detekci ironie', 'fi': 'LDR SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Pieniulotteinen tekstiesitys ironian havaitsemiseen', 'he': 'LDR ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 3: מייצג טקסט במימד נמוך לגלות אירוניה', 'jv': 'DNR at semiinval-2013 task 3: A low Dimensial Text representation for irny detection', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'LDR na SemEval-2018 naloga 3: nizkodimenzionalna predstavitev besedila za odkrivanje ironije', 'bo': 'LDR at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Low Dimensional Text Representation for Irony Detection'}
{'en': 'In this paper we describe our participation in the SemEval-2018 task 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. We have approached the task with our low dimensionality representation method (LDR), which exploits low dimensional features extracted from text on the basis of the occurrence probability of the words depending on each class. Our intuition is that words in ironic texts have different probability of occurrence than in non-ironic ones. Our approach obtained acceptable results in both subtasks A and B. We have performed an error analysis that shows the difference on correct and incorrect classified tweets.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف مشاركتنا في مهمة SemEval-2018 3 المشتركة حول الكشف عن السخرية. لقد تعاملنا مع المهمة باستخدام طريقة التمثيل ذات الأبعاد المنخفضة (LDR) ، والتي تستغل ميزات الأبعاد المنخفضة المستخرجة من النص على أساس احتمالية حدوث الكلمات اعتمادًا على كل فئة. حدسنا هو أن الكلمات الموجودة في النصوص الساخرة لها احتمالية حدوث مختلفة عن تلك الموجودة في النصوص غير الساخرة. حصل نهجنا على نتائج مقبولة في كلتا المهمتين الفرعيتين أ و ب. لقد أجرينا تحليل خطأ يوضح الاختلاف في التغريدات المصنفة الصحيحة وغير الصحيحة.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo descrevemos nossa participação na tarefa 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection do SemEval-2018. Abordamos a tarefa com nosso método de representação de baixa dimensionalidade (LDR), que explora características de baixa dimensão extraídas do texto com base na probabilidade de ocorrência das palavras dependendo de cada classe. Nossa intuição é que as palavras em textos irônicos têm probabilidade de ocorrência diferente do que em não-irônicos. Nossa abordagem obteve resultados aceitáveis em ambas as subtarefas A e B. Realizamos uma análise de erro que mostra a diferença entre os tweets classificados corretos e incorretos.', 'es': 'En este artículo describimos nuestra participación en la tarea 3 de Semeval-2018 Shared Task on Irony Detection. Hemos abordado la tarea con nuestro método de representación de baja dimensionalidad (LDR), que aprovecha las características de baja dimensión extraídas del texto en función de la probabilidad de ocurrencia de las palabras según cada clase. Nuestra intuición es que las palabras en los textos irónicos tienen una probabilidad diferente de ocurrir que en los no irónicos. Nuestro enfoque obtuvo resultados aceptables en las subtareas A y B. Hemos realizado un análisis de errores que muestra la diferencia entre los tuits clasificados correctos e incorrectos.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons notre participation à la tâche partagée SEMEval-2018 task 3 sur la détection de l'ironie. Nous avons abordé la tâche avec notre méthode de représentation à faible dimensionnalité (LDR), qui exploite les caractéristiques de faible dimension extraites du texte sur la base de la probabilité d'occurrence des mots en fonction de chaque classe. Notre intuition est que les mots dans les textes ironiques ont une probabilité d'occurrence différente de celle des textes non ironiques. Notre approche a permis d'obtenir des résultats acceptables dans les sous-tâches A et B. Nous avons effectué une analyse d'erreur qui montre la différence entre les tweets classifiés corrects et incorrects.", 'ja': '本稿では、アイロニー検出に関するSemEval -2018タスク3共有タスクへの参加について説明します。各クラスに応じた単語の発生確率に基づいてテキストから抽出された低次元の特徴を利用する低次元表現法（ LDR ）でタスクにアプローチしました。皮肉な文章の中の単語は非皮肉な単語とは異なる確率で起こるという直感です私たちのアプローチは、サブタスクAとBの両方で許容可能な結果を得ました。私たちは、正しい分類されたツイートと正しくない分類されたツイートの違いを示すエラー分析を実施しました。', 'zh': '本文中,述SemEval-2018务3者讽刺性检共之。 吾既用低维示法(LDR)成此务,宜随类之单词概率,因文本之低维征。 吾侪之直觉,刺文之单词与非刺文之单词有异概率。 吾道在子职A与B俱得所受。 臣等执过析,以见是非之推文异。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем наше участие в задаче 3 SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Irony Detection. Мы подошли к задаче с помощью нашего метода представления низкой размерности (LDR), который использует низкоразмерные признаки, извлеченные из текста, на основе вероятности появления слов в зависимости от каждого класса. Наша интуиция заключается в том, что слова в иронических текстах имеют иную вероятность возникновения, чем в неироничных. Наш подход получил приемлемые результаты как в подзадачах А, так и в Б. Мы провели анализ ошибок, который показывает разницу в правильных и неправильных классифицированных твитах.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 विडंबना का पता लगाने पर साझा कार्य में हमारी भागीदारी का वर्णन करते हैं। हमने अपने कम आयामी प्रतिनिधित्व विधि (एलडीआर) के साथ कार्य से संपर्क किया है, जो प्रत्येक वर्ग के आधार पर शब्दों की घटना की संभावना के आधार पर पाठ से निकाली गई कम आयामी विशेषताओं का शोषण करता है। हमारा अंतर्ज्ञान यह है कि विडंबनापूर्ण ग्रंथों में शब्दों में गैर-विडंबनापूर्ण लोगों की तुलना में घटना की अलग-अलग संभावना है। हमारे दृष्टिकोण ने उप-कार्य ए और बी दोनों में स्वीकार्य परिणाम प्राप्त किए। हमने एक त्रुटि विश्लेषण किया है जो सही और गलत वर्गीकृत ट्वीट्स पर अंतर दिखाता है।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid cur síos ar ár rannpháirtíocht i dtasc SemEval-2018 3 Tasc Comhroinnte ar Bhrath an Iarainn. Táimid tar éis tabhairt faoin tasc lenár modh ionadaíochta toise íseal (LDR), a bhaineann leas as gnéithe ísealtoiseacha a bhaintear as téacs ar bhonn na dóchúlachta go dtarlódh na focail ag brath ar gach rang. Is é ár n-intleacht go bhfuil dóchúlacht éagsúil ag focail i dtéacsanna íorónacha go dtarlóidh siad ná i gceann neamhíorónach. Fuair ár gcur chuige torthaí inghlactha sa dá fhothasc A agus B. Rinneamar anailís earráide a thaispeánann an difríocht ar thíteanna rangaithe cearta agus míchearta.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk, hogy részt vettünk a SemEval-2018 feladatban 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. A feladatot alacsony dimenziós reprezentációs módszerünkkel (LDR) közelítettük meg, amely a szövegből kivont alacsony dimenziós jellemzőket a szavak előfordulási valószínűsége alapján használja ki. Intuíciónk szerint az ironikus szövegekben szereplő szavak eltérő valószínűséggel rendelkeznek, mint a nem ironikus szövegekben. Megközelítésünk elfogadható eredményeket ért el mind az A, mind a B alcsoportban. Hibaelemzést végeztünk, amely megmutatja a különbséget a helyes és helytelen minősített tweeteken.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία περιγράφουμε τη συμμετοχή μας στην εργασία 3 Κοινή Εργασία για την Ανίχνευση ειρωνείας. Προσεγγίσαμε το έργο με τη μέθοδο αναπαράστασης χαμηλής διαστασιμότητας (η οποία εκμεταλλεύεται χαρακτηριστικά χαμηλής διαστασιμότητας που εξάγονται από κείμενο με βάση την πιθανότητα εμφάνισης των λέξεων ανάλογα με κάθε κατηγορία. Η διαίσθησή μας είναι ότι οι λέξεις σε ειρωνικά κείμενα έχουν διαφορετική πιθανότητα εμφάνισης από ότι σε μη ειρωνικά κείμενα. Η προσέγγισή μας απέκτησε αποδεκτά αποτελέσματα και στις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες Α και Β. Έχουμε πραγματοποιήσει ανάλυση σφαλμάτων που δείχνει τη διαφορά σε σωστά και λανθασμένα ταξινομημένα tweets.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენი დაწყვეტილება SemEval-2018 დავალების სამყოფ დავალების სამყოფ დავალება Irony Detection-ზე. ჩვენ მივიღეთ რაოდენობას ჩვენი ცოტა განზომილებების გამოსახულება (LDR), რომელიც გამოყენებს ცოტა განზომილებების გამოსახულება ტექსტიდან გამოიყენებული სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ყოვე ჩვენი ინტეუცია არის ის, რომ სიტყვები იპონიკური ტექსტში განსხვავებული შესაძლებლობა არა იპონიკური შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენი პროგრამის მიღებული წარმოდგენება A და B-ში. ჩვენ ვაკეთეთეთ შეცდომა ანალიზი, რომელიც გამოჩვენება განსხვავებას მარტივი და მარტივი კლასიფიკაციური tweets-ზე.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ го опишуваме нашето учество во "SemEval-2018" задачата 3 "Shared Task on Irony Detection". We have approached the task with our low dimensionality representation method (LDR), which exploits low dimensional features extracted from text on the basis of the occurrence probability of the words depending on each class.  Нашата интуиција е дека зборовите во ироничките тексти имаат различна веројатност за случување отколку во неироничките. Нашиот пристап доби прифатливи резултати во двата потпрашања А и Б. Правивме анализа на грешки која ја покажува разликата на правилните и неправилните класифицирани твитови.', 'lt': 'In this paper we describe our participation in the SemEval-2018 task 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection.  Atlikome užduotį taikant savo mažo matmens reprezentacijos metodą (LDR), kuris naudoja mažo matmens charakteristikas, išskirtas iš teksto, remiantis žodžių pasikartojimo tikimybe, priklausomai nuo kiekvienos klasės. Mūsų intuicija ta, kad ironiniuose tekstuose žodžiai turi skirtingą tikimybę įvykti nei ne ironiniuose. Mūsų metodas gavo priimtinus rezultatus abiejuose A ir B paklausimuose. atlikome klaidų analizę, kuri parodė skirtumą teisingais ir neteisingais klasifikuotais tweetais.', 'it': "In questo articolo descriviamo la nostra partecipazione al compito SemEval-2018 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. Abbiamo affrontato il compito con il nostro metodo di rappresentazione a bassa dimensionalità (LDR), che sfrutta caratteristiche a bassa dimensione estratte dal testo sulla base della probabilità di occorrenza delle parole a seconda di ogni classe. La nostra intuizione è che le parole nei testi ironici hanno probabilità di verificarsi diverse rispetto a quelle non ironiche. Il nostro approccio ha ottenuto risultati accettabili in entrambe le sottoattività A e B. Abbiamo eseguito un'analisi degli errori che mostra la differenza su tweet classificati corretti e errati.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз біздің біздің біріміздің бөлімімізді төмірлік-2018 тапсырмасының 3 бөлікті тапсырмасын жетілдіру үшін тапсырманы таңдаймыз. Біз тапсырмаға өзіміздің төменгі өлшемдік таңдау тәсілімімізді (LDR) көмектесдік. Бұл мәтіннен төменгі өлшемдік мүмкіндіктерді әрбір класқа тәуелді сөздердің кездесу мү Ироникалық мәтіндер сөздерінің ироникалық мәтіндерінде айырмашылық болуы мүмкіндігі болады. Біздің қасиетіміз "А" және "B" ішінде қабылданатын нәтижелер бар. Біз қате анализ істедік. Біз дұрыс және дұрыс шектелген tweets қасиетін көрсетеді.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2018 даалгаварын 3 Төмөр нээлттэй хуваалтын ажил дээр оролцож байгааг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид үүнийг бага хэмжээсүүдийг харуулах арга (LDR) руу ойртсон. Энэ нь хэмжээсүүдийн бага хэмжээсүүдийг текстээс гаргасан үгнүүдийн магадлал бүр хичээлд хамаарч байгаа. Бидний бодлоор ирээдүйн текстүүдийн үг нь ирээдүйгээс өөр боломжтой байх боломжтой. Бидний арга барилга нь A болон B доор хоёуланг хүлээн зөвхөн буруу хэвлэгдсэн tweets дээр ялгааг харуулдаг алдаа шинжилгээ хийсэн.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi vårt deltaka i semiEval-2018-oppgåva 3 delt oppgåve om Irony Detection. Vi har nærmet oppgåva med vår låg dimensjonalitetsrepresentasjonsmetode (LDR), som eksploderer låg dimensjonal funksjonar ut frå teksten på grunn av sannsynligheten for oppgåva av ord avhengig av kvar klasse. Intuisjonen vårt er at ord i ironiske tekstar har ulike sannsynligheten for oppføring enn i ikkje-ironiske tekstar. Tilnærminga vårt fikk akseptabel resultat i både underspørsmål A og B. Vi har utført ein feilanalyse som viser forskjellen på korrekte og feil klassifiserte tweeter.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menjelaskan ketertarikan kami dalam tugas SemEval-2018 3 Tugas Berkongsi tentang Pengesanan Ironi. We have approached the task with our low dimensionality representation method (LDR), which exploits low dimensional features extracted from text on the basis of the occurrence probability of the words depending on each class.  Intuisi kita ialah bahawa perkataan dalam teks ironik mempunyai kebarangkalian berlainan kejadian daripada perkataan yang bukan ironik. pendekatan kami mendapat keputusan yang diterima dalam kedua-dua subtaska A dan B. Kami telah melakukan analisis ralat yang menunjukkan perbezaan pada tweet yang betul dan salah.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നതാണെന്ന് വിവരിക് എല്ലാ ക്ലാസിലും ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ സംഭവ്യത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട വിശേഷങ്ങളുടെ കുറച്ച് മാന്യമായ പ്രതി നമ്മുടെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിഹസിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ് സംഭവിക്കുന്നത്. ഞങ്ങളുടെ വഴിയില്\u200d സ്വീകരിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എ, ബി എന്നിട്ടും ലഭിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. തെറ്റായ ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസവും കാണിക്കു', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument niddeskrivu l-parteċipazzjoni tagħna fil-kompitu SemEval-2018 3 Kompitu Konġunt dwar id-Detezzjoni tal-Ironja. Aċċettajna l-kompitu bil-metodu ta’ rappreżentazzjoni tad-dimensjonalità baxxa tagħna (LDR), li jisfrutta karatteristiċi dimensjonali baxxi estratti mit-test abbażi tal-probabbiltà tal-okkorrenza tal-kliem skont kull klassi. L-intwizzjoni tagħna hija li l-kliem fit-testi ironiċi għandhom probabbiltà differenti ta’ okkorrenza milli f’dawk mhux ironiċi. L-approċċ tagħna kiseb riżultati aċċettabbli fiż-żewġ sottomistoqsijiet A u B. Sarna analiżi ta’ żball li turi d-differenza fuq tweets ikklassifikati korretti u mhux korretti.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare descriem participarea noastră la sarcina SemEval-2018 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. Am abordat sarcina cu metoda noastră de reprezentare a dimensiunii scăzute (LDR), care exploatează caracteristicile dimensionale scăzute extrase din text pe baza probabilității apariției cuvintelor în funcție de fiecare clasă. Intuiția noastră este că cuvintele din textele ironice au o probabilitate diferită de apariție decât în cele non-ironice. Abordarea noastră a obținut rezultate acceptabile în ambele subsarcini A și B. Am efectuat o analiză a erorilor care arată diferența pe tweeturile clasificate corecte și incorecte.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa qayb-ka qeybqaadashada shaqada SemEval-2018 3 Shaqada loo sharciyey baaritaanka ajnabiga. Waxaannu u soo dhowaadnay shaqada qaababkayaga u dhigista hoos u yar (LDR), kaas oo ku baaraandegay tayooyin hoos u ah oo laga soo saaray qoraalka, sababtoo ah suurtagalka hadallada oo ku xiran fasalka walba. Fikiradayada waa in hadallada qoraalka jacaylka ku qoran ay leeyihiin suurtagal kala duduwan oo ka mid ah kuwa aan caqli lahayn. Dhaqdhaheenna waxaa helay resultooyin la aqbali karo labada shaqaalaha A iyo B. Waxaannu sameynnay baaritaan khalad ah oo muuqata kala duwanaanshaha tweetiyada saxda ah ee saxda ah oo aan khaas aheyn.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi vårt deltagande i SemEval-2018 uppgift 3 Delad uppgift om Irony Detection. Vi har närmat oss uppgiften med vår lågdimensionella representationsmetod (LDR), som utnyttjar lågdimensionella egenskaper extraherade från text utifrån förekomstsannolikheten för orden beroende på varje klass. Vår intuition är att ord i ironiska texter har olika sannolikhet för förekomst än i icke-ironiska. Vårt tillvägagångssätt fick godtagbara resultat i både underuppgifter A och B. Vi har utfört en felanalys som visar skillnaden på korrekta och felaktiga klassificerade tweets.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் SemEval-2018 பணியில் எங்கள் பங்கிடுதலை விவரிக்கிறோம் Iron Detection 3 பகிர்ந்த பணி நாங்கள் எங்கள் செயலை எங்கள் குறைந்த பரிமாற்றம் பிரித்தல் முறையில் நெருங்கி விட்டோம் (LDR), அது ஒவ்வொரு வகுப்பிலும் சார்ந்த சாத்தியமான சொல்லு நம்முடைய உணர்வு என்னவென்றால் வார்த்தைகளில் வெவ்வேறு வார்த்தைகள் எதிர்பார்ப்பு வித்தியாசமான சாத்தியம் இர A மற்றும் B துணை செயல்களிலும் ஏற்றுக் கொள்ள முடிவுகள் பெற்றது. நாங்கள் ஒரு பிழை ஆய்வு செய்துள்ளோம். சரியான மற்றும் தவறான வகைப்', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy nasz udział w zadaniu SemEval-2018 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. Podejśliśmy do zadania metodą reprezentacji niskiej wymiarowości (LDR), która wykorzystuje niskie cechy wyekstrahowane z tekstu na podstawie prawdopodobieństwa występowania słów w zależności od każdej klasy. Nasza intuicja jest taka, że słowa w tekstach ironicznych mają inne prawdopodobieństwo wystąpienia niż w tekstach nieironicznych. Nasze podejście uzyskało akceptowalne wyniki zarówno w podzadaniach A, jak i B. Przeprowadziliśmy analizę błędu, która pokazuje różnicę w prawidłowych i nieprawidłowych sklasyfikowanych tweetach.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ہمارا حصہ سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس 3 شریک ٹاکس کی آیرونی شناسایی پر بیان کرتے ہیں. ہم نے اپنے نیچے اندازے کی نمایش طریقہ (LDR) کے ساتھ اس کام کے پاس پہنچ گئے ہیں جو ہر کلاس پر اعتماد رکھنے والی کلاس کے پائیں لکھنے والی کلاس سے کم اندازے کی نشانیاں اٹھائی جاتی ہیں۔ ہماری نظر یہ ہے کہ کلمات ایرونیک پیغام میں غیر ایرونیک پیغام سے مختلف ہو سکتے ہیں۔ ہماری تقریبا قبول کرنے والی نتیجے آ اور ب کے دونوں سٹسٹسٹ میں آئے ہیں. ہم نے ایک خطا تحلیل کیا ہے جو درست اور غلط مخلوط ٹویٹ کے متفاوت کو دکھاتا ہے.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naše sudjelovanje u zadatku pola Evala-2018. 3 zajednički zadatak o detekciji željeza. Prišli smo zadatku sa metodom predstavljanja niske dimenzionalnosti (LDR), koja eksplodira niske dimenzionalne karakteristike izvučene iz teksta na osnovu verovatnosti pojavljivanja reči ovisnosti o svakoj klasi. Naša intuicija je da reči u ironičkim tekstima imaju različite verovatnoće događaja nego u neironičkim. Naš pristup je dobio prihvatljive rezultate i podataka A i B. Provodili smo analizu greške koja pokazuje razliku o točnim i nepravednom klasifikovanim tweetima.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අපේ සම්වේල් 2018 කාර්යයේ අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න තුන්වෙනි කාර්යාලයේ සම්වේල් තුන්වෙනි වැඩක් ව අපි අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණ අවශ්\u200dයතාව (LDR) සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා අපේ පරීක්ෂණය තමයි අයිරෝනික් පත්තරේ වචන් වලට වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, අයිරෝනික් වලින් ව අපේ විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර A සහ B දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබුනා.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda SemEval-2018 vazifani 3 Ishga qidirilgan vazifani anglatamiz. Biz vazifani qo'shimcha taqdimlik usuli (LDR) bilan keldik. Bu so'zlar har bir sinfga murakkab bo'lgan so'zlardan bir xil bo'lgan so'zlardan chiqish qo'shimcha xususiyatlarni ishlab chiqaradi. Bizning ongimizning fikrimimiz, ironisk matnlarda so'zlar o'zgarishga o'xshash o'zgarishdir. Biz muvaffaqiyatlarimizga murojaat qilingan natijalarimiz A va B vazifalarga ega. Biz haqiqiqiy va notoʻgʻri notoʻgʻri xabarlarni koʻrsatish uchun xato analyzerni bajardik.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi mô tả sự tham gia của chúng tôi trong nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8. Nhiệm vụ chia sẻ về trinh sát mỉa mai. Chúng ta đã tiếp cận nhiệm vụ với phương pháp phân biệt chiều không dày, nó khai thác các tính chất không gian nhỏ chiết xuất từ văn bản dựa trên khả năng xảy ra các từ tùy thuộc vào từng lớp. Theo trực giác của chúng tôi thì từ ngữ trong văn bản mỉa mai có khả năng xảy ra khác với những chữ không mỉa mai. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi có kết quả có thể chấp nhận cả phần A và B. Chúng tôi đã thực hiện một bài phân tích lỗi cho thấy sự khác nhau trên các tweet đúng và sai.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we onze deelname aan de SemEval-2018 taak 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. We hebben de taak benaderd met onze low dimensionality representation method (LDR), die gebruik maakt van laagdimensionale kenmerken die zijn geëxtraheerd uit tekst op basis van de waarschijnlijkheid voor het voorkomen van de woorden afhankelijk van elke klasse. Onze intuïtie is dat woorden in ironische teksten een andere kans hebben om te voorkomen dan in niet-ironische teksten. Onze aanpak heeft acceptabele resultaten opgeleverd in zowel subtaken A als B. We hebben een foutanalyse uitgevoerd die het verschil toont op correcte en onjuiste geclassificeerde tweets.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi vores deltagelse i SemEval-2018 opgave 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. Vi har nærmet os opgaven med vores low dimensionality representation method (LDR), som udnytter lavdimensionelle egenskaber udvundet fra tekst på grundlag af forekomstsandsynligheden for ordene afhængigt af hver klasse. Vores intuition er, at ord i ironiske tekster har anden sandsynlighed for forekomst end i ikke-ironiske. Vores tilgang opnåede acceptable resultater i både underopgaver A og B. Vi har udført en fejlanalyse, der viser forskellen på korrekte og ukorrekte klassificerede tweets.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naše učešće u zadatku pola Evala-2018. 3 zajednički zadatak o detekciji željeza. Približili smo se zadatku našim metodom predstavljanja niske dimenzionalnosti (LDR), koja iskorištava niske dimenzionalne karakteristike izvučene iz teksta na temelju vjerojatnosti pojavljivanja riječi ovisnosti o svakoj klasi. Naša intuicija je da riječi u ironičkim tekstima imaju različite vjerojatnosti događaja nego u neironičnim. Naš pristup je dobio prihvatljive rezultate i podataka A i B. Napravili smo analizu greške koja pokazuje razliku o točnim i nepravilnim tajnim tweetima.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir unsere Beteiligung an der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. Wir haben uns dieser Aufgabe mit unserer Low Dimensionality Representation Methode (LDR) nähert, die niederdimensionale Merkmale nutzt, die aus Text extrahiert werden, basierend auf der Eintrittswahrscheinlichkeit der Wörter je nach Klasse. Unsere Intuition ist, dass Wörter in ironischen Texten eine andere Eintrittswahrscheinlichkeit haben als in nicht-ironischen. Unser Ansatz erzielte akzeptable Ergebnisse in beiden Teilaufgaben A und B. Wir haben eine Fehleranalyse durchgeführt, die den Unterschied bei korrekten und falschen klassifizierten Tweets zeigt.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме нашето участие в задача 3 Споделена задача за откриване на ирония. Приближихме се към задачата с метода за представяне на ниските измерения, който използва нискоизмерени черти, извлечени от текста въз основа на вероятността за поява на думите в зависимост от всеки клас. Нашата интуиция е, че думите в ироничните текстове имат различна вероятност за възникване, отколкото в неироничните. Нашият подход постигна приемливи резултати както в подзадачите А, така и в Б. Извършихме анализ на грешките, който показва разликата между правилните и неправилните класифицирани туитове.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menjelaskan parteċipasi kami dalam tugas SemEval-2018 3 Tugas Bersama tentang Deteksi Ironi. Kami telah mendekati tugas dengan metode representation dimensi rendah (LDR), yang mengeksploitasi fitur dimensi rendah yang diekstraksi dari teks berdasarkan kemungkinan kejadian kata-kata tergantung pada setiap kelas. Intuisi kita adalah bahwa kata-kata dalam teks ironis memiliki kemungkinan yang berbeda dari yang tidak ironis. Our approach obtained acceptable results in both subtasks A and B. We have performed an error analysis that shows the difference on correct and incorrect classified tweets.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili tunaelezea ushiriki wetu katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 3 ilishirikishwa na kazi ya Kugundua Uholanzi. Tumekaribia juhudi letu la uwakilishaji wa hali ya chini (LDR), ambalo linatumia vipengele vya kidini vilivyotokana na maandishi kwa sababu ya uwezekano wa uwezekano wa maneno yanategemea kwa kila darasa. Utafiti wetu ni kwamba maneno katika maandishi ya kejeli yana uwezekano tofauti wa kutokea kuliko kwa wale wasio na kejeli. Hatua yetu ilipata matokeo yanayokubalika katika kazi za A na B. Tumefanya uchambuzi wa makosa unaoonyesha tofauti katika twiti za sahihi na zisizo sahihi.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz SemEval-2018 zadyň 3-nji Beýik Taýýarlama Görevinde goşulyşymyzy tassykladyk. Biz bu işe düşük ölçüliklerimiz (LDR) yöntemi bilen yaklaşdyrdyk. Bu iň düşük ölçülikleriň sözlerin her sınıfta baglanýan mümkinçiligi üçin metinden çykarylýan düşük ölçüliklerini ulanýar. Biziň duýgunymyz ironik metinlerde sözleriň ironik däldiklerde bolmagyň mümkinçiligi ýok. Biziň ýaryşymyz hem A we B subtesasynda kabul edilen netijede tapyldy. Biz hata analyzasyny çykardyk. Dogry we ýalňyş klassif tweetlerde tapawutlygy görkezýäris.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما مشارکت ما را توصیف می\u200cکنیم در وظیفه\u200cی نیمه\u200cسال-۲۰۱۸، وظیفه\u200cی سه شریک در مورد کشف آهنگی. ما به وظیفه نزدیک شدیم با روش نمایش اندازه\u200cای پایین (LDR) که ویژگی\u200cهای اندازه\u200cای پایین را از متن خارج می\u200cکند، بر اساس احتمال اتفاق افتادن کلمات بستگی به هر کلاس. نظر ما این است که کلمات در متن های مسخره\u200cای احتمال اتفاق متفاوتی از اتفاق غیر مسخره دارند. دستور ما نتیجه\u200cهای پذیرفته\u200cای را در زیر آب و ب گرفته است. ما یک تحلیل خطایی انجام داده\u200cایم که تفاوت در tweets درست و اشتباه مختصر را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ የSemEval-2018 ስራ 3 የኢሮኒ ምርመራ ላይ ተሳካሚ ስራዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሁሉም ክፍሎች ላይ በተደገፈ ቃላት የሚደረገውን የጽሑፍ ውጤቶች በሚወስደው ጥቂት የሥልጣን አካላት አቀረብን፡፡ የስህተታችን ቃላት በፀሐይ ጽሑፎች ውስጥ ከፀሐይ ነፃነት ይልቅ ልዩ ልዩ ነው፡፡ አካሄዳችን የሚቀበል ፍሬዎች አ እና B በመስኮቶች ውስጥ አግኝተናል፡፡ የስህተት ትዊተቶችን የተለየውን ጥያቄ እና የተለያየውን ጥያቄ እና የተለየውን ጥያቄ አቆምተናል፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskryf ons deelnadering in die SemEval-2018 taak 3 Gedeelde Opdrag op Irony-Opdekking. Ons het die taak aangekom met ons lae dimensionaliteit verteenwoording metode (LDR), wat uitbreek lae dimensionale funksies wat uit teks uitgevoer is op die basis van die voorkoms waarskynlik van die woorde afhang op elke klas. Ons intuisie is dat woorde in ironiese teks verskillende waarskynlik van voorkoms het as in nie-ironiese een. Ons toegang het aanvaarbare resultate ontvang in beide subtaske A en B. Ons het 'n fout analisie uitgevoer wat die verskil vertoon op korrek en verkeerde klassifiseerde tweets.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne përshkruajmë pjesëmarrjen tonë në detyrën SemEval-2018 3 Detyrën e Përbashkët për Detektimin e Ironisë. Kemi afruar detyrën me metodën tonë të përfaqësimit të dimensionalitetit të ulët (LDR), që shfrytëzon karakteristikat e dimensionalitetit të ulët të nxjerrur nga teksti në bazë të probabilitetit të ndodhjes së fjalëve në varësi të çdo klase. Intuicioni ynë është se fjalët në tekstet ironike kanë një probabilitet të ndryshëm të ndodhjes sesa në ato jo ironike. Përqasja jonë arriti rezultate të pranueshme në të dyja nënpyetjet A dhe B. Ne kemi bërë një analizë gabimi që tregon ndryshimin në tweetet e klasifikuar korrekt dhe të gabuar.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր մասնակցությունը 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի հանձնարարության 3-րդ հանձնարարության մեջ: We have approached the task with our low dimensionality representation method (LDR), which exploits low dimensional features extracted from text on the basis of the occurrence probability of the words depending on each class.  Մեր ինտուիցիան այն է, որ հեգնական տեքստներում բառերը տարբեր հավանականություններ ունեն, քան ոչ հեգնական տեքստներում: Մեր մոտեցումը ստացավ ընդունելի արդյունքներ երկու A և B ենթահարցերում: Մենք կատարեցինք սխալների վերլուծություն, որը ցույց է տալիս ճիշտ և սխալ դասակարգված թվիթերի տարբերությունը:', 'az': 'Bu kağıtda biz halımızı İroni keşfetməsi barəsində SemEval-2018 işin in üçüncü paylaşılmış işi tarif edirik. Biz bu işə düşük ölçülük göstəricisi metodlarımızla yaxınlaşdıq ki, hər sınıfta bağlı sözlərin olaraq gələn mümkün olaraq mətndən çıxarılan düşük ölçülük xüsusiyyətlərini istifadə edir. İronik mətnlərdə sözlər ironik olmayan mətnlərdən daha çox fərqli olaraq gələcək olaraq. Bizim yaxınlığımız hər ikisinin A və B subtasklarında qəbul edilən müxtəlif sonuçlar aldı.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা আমাদের অংশগ্রহণের বর্ণনা করছি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ৩ শেয়ার করা হয়েছে আইরোনি ডিটেক্টরের উপর। আমরা আমাদের কাজের কাছে পৌঁছে গেছি নিম্নলিখিত প্রতিনিধিত্বের মাধ্যমে (এলডিআর), যা প্রত্যেক শ্রেণীর উপর নির্ভর করে শব্দের সম্ভাবনার ভিত্তিতে লেখ আমাদের অনুভূতি হচ্ছে যে বিদ্রূপ লেখার শব্দের বিভিন্ন সম্ভাবনা রয়েছে বিদ্রূপের থেকে। আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা গ্রহণযোগ্য ফলাফল পেয়েছে সাবটাস এ এবং বি। আমরা একটি ভুল বিশ্লেষণ করেছি যা সঠিক এবং ভুল বিভিন্ন টুইটের পার্থক্', 'ca': "En aquest paper descrivim la nostra participació a la tasca SemEval-2018 3 Task Shared on Irony Detection. Hem abordat la tasca amb el nostre mètode de representació de baixa dimensionalitat (LDR), que explota característiques baixes dimensionals extraites del text en funció de la probabilitat d'ocurrència de les paraules segons cada classe. La nostra intuïció és que les paraules en els textos irònics tenen probabilitats diferents d'ocurrència que en les no iròniques. El nostre enfocament va obtenir resultats acceptables en les dues subtaskes A i B. Hem fet una an àlisi d'errors que mostra la diferència en tweets classificats correctes i incorrectes.", 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldame meie osalemist SemEval-2018 ülesandes 3 "Jagatud ülesanne iroonia tuvastamiseks". Oleme ülesandele lähenenud madala dimensionaalsuse esitamise meetodiga (LDR), mis kasutab tekstist ekstraheeritud madalamõõtmelisi tunnuseid sõnade esinemise tõenäosuse alusel sõltuvalt igast klassist. Meie intuitsioon on, et iroonilistes tekstides esinevate sõnade esinemise tõenäosus on erinev kui mitte-iroonilistes tekstides. Meie lähenemisviis saavutas vastuvõetavad tulemused nii alamülesannetes A kui ka B. Oleme läbi viinud veaanalüüsi, mis näitab erinevust õigete ja ebaõigete salastatud säutsude puhul.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리가SemEval-18퀘스트3에 참여한 반어 검측에 관한 공유 퀘스트의 상황을 묘사했다.우리는 이미 우리의 저차원 표시 방법(LDR)으로 이 임무를 완성했다. 이 방법은 텍스트에서 추출한 저차원 특징을 이용하는데 이런 특징은 단어의 출현 확률을 바탕으로 각 유형에 달려 있다.우리의 직감은 반풍 텍스트의 단어가 나타날 확률이 비반풍 텍스트의 단어와 다르다는 것이다.우리의 방법은 하위 작업 A와 B에서 모두 받아들일 수 있는 결과를 얻었다. 우리는 오류 분석을 실시하여 정확한 것과 잘못된 분류 트윗의 차이를 나타냈다.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naše sudjelovanje u zadatku semiEval-2018. 3 zajednički zadatak o detekciji željeza. Prišli smo zadatku sa metodom predstavljanja niske dimenzionalnosti (LDR), koja eksplodira niske dimenzionalne karakteristike izvučene iz teksta na temelju vjerojatnosti pojavljivanja riječi ovisnosti o svakoj klasi. Naša intuicija je da riječi u ironičkim tekstima imaju različite vjerojatnosti događaja nego u neironičnim. Naš pristup je dobio prihvatljive rezultate u podstavcima A i B. Napravili smo analizu greške koja pokazuje razliku na ispravnim i nepravnim tajnim tweetima.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme naši účast na úkolu SemEval-2018 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. K úkolu jsme přistupovali metodou reprezentace nízké dimenzionality (LDR), která využívá nízkorozměrné rysy extrahované z textu na základě pravděpodobnosti výskytu slov v závislosti na jednotlivých třídách. Naše intuice je taková, že slova v ironických textech mají jinou pravděpodobnost výskytu než v ironických textech. Náš přístup získal přijatelné výsledky v podúkolech A i B. Provedli jsme analýzu chyb, která ukazuje rozdíl na správných a nesprávných klasifikovaných tweetech.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme osallistumistamme SemEval-2018 tehtävään 3 Shared Task on Irony Detection. Olemme lähestyneet tehtävää LDR-menetelmällä (Low Dimensionality Representation Method, Low Dimensionality Representation Method, Low Dimensionality Representation Method, LDR), joka hyödyntää tekstistä poimittuja matalaulotteisia piirteitä sanojen esiintymistodennäköisyyden perusteella kunkin luokan mukaan. Intuitiomme on, että ironisissa teksteissä sanoilla on erilainen todennäköisyys esiintyä kuin ei-ironisissa teksteissä. Lähestymistapamme saavutti hyväksyttäviä tuloksia sekä alatehtävissä A että B. Olemme tehneet virheanalyysin, joka osoittaa oikean ja väärän luokitellun twiitin eron.', 'ha': "A cikin wannan takarda, Munã bayyana ushurinmu a cikin aikin SemEl-2018 3 Mun kusantar aikin da hanyoyinmu na ƙari da shirin mai nuna shi (LDR), wanda ke samu da haske masu sauri daga matsayin da aka samu shi, a kan muhimmin kalmõmin da ke ƙayyade ga duk daraja. Kayinmu na ce, maganar da ke cikin littãfin keki yana da wani mai yiwuwa wa'urar da ke cikin masu yin jerin. Tsarakanmu ya sãmi matsala masu yarda a cikin taskõkin A da B. Mun sami wani anayyar ɓarna wanda ke nuna gaɓanci a tsakanin Twitter masu inganci da kuma ba da daidai ba.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו מתארים את השתתפות שלנו במשימה "חצי-ערב-2018" הגענו למשימה עם שיטת מייצג מימדיות נמוכה שלנו (LDR), אשר מנצלת תכונות מימדיות נמוכות שמוציאות מהטקסט על בסיס סבירות התרחשות של המילים תלויים בכל כיתה. האינטואיציה שלנו היא שלמילים בטקסטים אירוניים יש סבירות שונה של התרחשות מאשר במילים לא אירוניים. הגישה שלנו השיגה תוצאות מקובלות בשני התשומות A ו-B. ביצענו ניתוח שגיאות שמראה את ההבדל בטוויטים מסווגים נכונים ולא נכונים.', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku opisujemo naše sodelovanje v nalogi SemEval-2018 3 Skupna naloga o odkrivanju ironije. Do naloge smo pristopili z našo metodo nizke dimenzionalnosti reprezentacije (LDR), ki izkorišča nizke dimenzionalne značilnosti, pridobljene iz besedila, na podlagi verjetnosti pojavljanja besed glede na vsak razred. Naša intuicija je, da imajo besede v ironičnih besedilih drugačno verjetnost pojava kot v neironičnih besedilih. Naš pristop je dosegel sprejemljive rezultate v podnalogah A in B. Izvedli smo analizo napak, ki kaže razliko med pravilnimi in nepravilnimi zaupnimi tweeti.', 'jv': 'Nang paper iki, kita rambarang nggawe Jejaring-Jejaring ing kune ning task 3 Samsul Taaksi bukane ning kejahatan urip. Awakdhéwé wis nambah nggambar kelompok nggambar kelompok Awakdhéwé, tualisan punika dipun-punika sing gak bakal terus-pernik nik kuwi wis dipun Awakdhéwé éntuk pergambar barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan ning A lan B', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྡོད་པ་ལ་(SemEval-2018)ལས་ཀྱི་དོན་ལྟར་བཤད་ ང་ཚོས་རྩ་ཆེ་ཆུང་བའི་དབྱིབས་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་ཁབ་པོ་ཞིག་གཟུགས་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་ཐད་ཚོར་འདུག་ནི་ཡི་གེ་ཚིག་ཚིག་ལས་སླར་ཡུལ་མེད་པའི་ནང་གི་མཐོང་ཚུལ་ཁྱད་པར་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་འབྲི་ཚིག་དང་འབྲེལ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་འཛུལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'ar': 'PunFields في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: الكشف عن المفارقة بأدوات تحليل الفكاهة', 'fr': "PunFields au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Détecter l'ironie par les outils d'analyse de l'humour", 'es': 'PunFields en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Detectar la ironía mediante herramientas de análisis de humor', 'pt': 'PunFields na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Detectando Ironia por Ferramentas de Análise de Humor', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のPunFieldsタスク3 ：ユーモア分析ツールによるアイロニーの検出', 'zh': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 务3:幽析检刺', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर PunFields: हास्य विश्लेषण के उपकरण ों द्वारा विडंबना का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'PunFields на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Обнаружение иронии с помощью инструментов юмористического анализа', 'ga': 'PunFields ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: íoróin a Bhrath trí Uirlisí Anailíse Humor', 'ka': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detecting by Humor Analysis Tools', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανίχνευση της ειρωνείας με εργαλεία ανάλυσης χιούμορ', 'hu': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irónia felismerése humor elemzés eszközeivel', 'it': "PunFields a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Rilevare l'ironia con strumenti di analisi dell'umorismo", 'kk': 'Бөлшек-2018 тапсырмасындағы PunFields 3- тапсырмасы: Хумор анализациялау құралы бойынша иронияны анықтау', 'mk': 'PunFields на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Детектирање иронија со алатки за анализа на хумор', 'lt': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'mt': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3- ലെ പുന്\u200dഫീല്\u200dഡുകള്\u200d: മനുഷ്യര്\u200d അന്യായം ഉപകരണങ്ങളാല്\u200d ഐറോണിനെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detected by Humor Analysis Tools', 'no': 'PunFields at semiEval-2018 Task 3: Finn Irony ved Verktøy for Humor Analysis', 'pl': 'Zadanie 3: Wykrywanie ironii za pomocą narzędzi analizy humoru', 'ro': 'PunFields la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Detectarea ironiei prin instrumente de analiză a umorului', 'si': 'PunFields at HalfEvel-2018 Job 3: Ironic Detection by Humor Research Tools', 'so': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Ironin by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'sr': 'PunFields na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: otkrivanje Ironije alatima humarne analize', 'sv': 'PunFields på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Att upptäcka ironi med verktyg för humor analys', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் புன்பில்லிட்ஸ்', 'ur': 'پانٹ فیلڈ سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس 3: ہمور تحلیل کے ابزار کے ذریعہ آئرونی پتہ لینے', 'ms': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 3: Name', 'vi': 'Mặt trận truy tìm Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8', 'nl': 'PunFields bij SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Ironie opsporen door middel van humoranalyse', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Откриване на ирония чрез инструменти за анализ на хумора', 'da': 'PunFields på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Opdagelse af ironi ved hjælp af værktøjer til humor analyse', 'hr': 'PunFields na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: otkrivanje Ironije alatima analize Humora', 'de': 'PunFields bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Ironie mit Humor-Analyse erkennen', 'id': 'PunFields di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Deteksi Ironi oleh Alat Analisi Humor', 'fa': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'sw': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Kugundua Ufungu na Vifaa vya Uchambuzi wa Binadamu', 'ko': '2018년 제3기 유머 체크 미션: Puny Eval 분석', 'sq': 'PunFields në SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'tr': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'af': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Opdekking van Ironie deur Nutsprogramme van Humor Analysis', 'hy': 'Պունֆիլդս 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ-2018" 3-րդ հանձնարարությունը. Հոմորի վերլուծության գործիքների միջոցով ճանաչելը', 'bn': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'bs': 'PunFields na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: otkrivanje Ironije alatima analize Humora', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Detekce ironie pomocí nástrojů humorové analýzy', 'fi': 'PunFields SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Ironian havaitseminen huumorianalyysin työkaluilla', 'az': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection by Humor Analysis Tools', 'ca': 'PunFields a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis', 'et': 'PunFields SemEval-2018 ülesanne 3: iroonia tuvastamine huumorianalüüsi tööriistade abil', 'jv': 'Punjads at semebal-2008 task 3: detecting irny by tools of Heror Test', 'he': 'PunFields ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: גילוי אירוניה על ידי כלי ניתוח ההומור', 'sk': 'PunFields na SemEval-2018 Naloga 3: Odkrivanje ironije z orodji za analizo humorja', 'ha': 'PunFifield at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 3: Finding Iron by tools of humanion Analyze', 'bo': 'PunFields at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detecting Irony by Tools of Humor Analysis'}
{'en': 'The paper describes our search for a universal algorithm of detecting intentional lexical ambiguity in different forms of creative language. At SemEval-2018 Task 3, we used PunFields, the system of automatic analysis of English puns that we introduced at SemEval-2017, to detect irony in tweets. Preliminary tests showed that it can reach the score of F1=0.596. However, at the competition, its result was F1=0.549.', 'fr': "L'article décrit notre recherche d'un algorithme universel permettant de détecter l'ambiguïté lexicale intentionnelle dans différentes formes de langage créatif. Lors de SemEval-2018 Task 3, nous avons utilisé PunFields, le système d'analyse automatique des jeux de mots en anglais que nous avons introduit à SemEval-2017, pour détecter l'ironie dans les tweets. Des tests préliminaires ont montré qu'il pouvait atteindre le score de F1 = 0,596. Cependant, lors de la compétition, son résultat était F1 = 0,549.", 'ar': 'تصف الورقة بحثنا عن خوارزمية عالمية لاكتشاف الغموض المعجمي المتعمد في أشكال مختلفة من اللغة الإبداعية. في SemEval-2018 Task 3 ، استخدمنا PunFields ، نظام التحليل التلقائي للتورية الإنجليزية الذي قدمناه في SemEval-2017 ، لاكتشاف المفارقة في التغريدات. أظهرت الاختبارات الأولية أنه يمكن أن يصل إلى درجة F1 = 0.596. ومع ذلك ، في المنافسة ، كانت نتيجتها F1 = 0.549.', 'es': 'El artículo describe nuestra búsqueda de un algoritmo universal para detectar la ambigüedad léxica intencional en diferentes formas de lenguaje creativo. En la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018, utilizamos PunFields, el sistema de análisis automático de juegos de palabras en inglés que introdujimos en SemEval-2017, para detectar la ironía en los tuits. Las pruebas preliminares mostraron que puede alcanzar la puntuación de F1 = 0.596. Sin embargo, en la competencia, su resultado fue F1=0.549.', 'pt': 'O artigo descreve nossa busca por um algoritmo universal de detecção de ambiguidade lexical intencional em diferentes formas de linguagem criativa. Na Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2018, usamos o PunFields, o sistema de análise automática de trocadilhos em inglês que introduzimos no SemEval-2017, para detectar ironia nos tweets. Testes preliminares mostraram que pode atingir o escore de F1=0,596. Porém, na competição, seu resultado foi F1=0,549.', 'ja': 'この論文では、さまざまな形の創造的言語における意図的な語彙の曖昧さを検出する普遍的なアルゴリズムを探求することについて説明しています。SemEval -2018 Task 3では、SemEval -2017で導入した英語パンの自動分析システムPunFieldsを使用して、ツイートの皮肉を検出しました。予備テストではF 1 = 0.596のスコアに到達できることが示された。しかし、競技会ではF 1 = 0.549という結果に終わった。', 'zh': '本文述了我们对一种通用算法的搜索,该算法可以检测不同的创造性语言中有意词汇歧义。 SemEval-2018 Task 3之中,用PunFields(SemEval-2017引英语双关语自析其统)以检其刺意。 初步测试表明,致F1=0.596之分。 然较之中,其F1 = 0.549也。', 'hi': 'पेपर रचनात्मक भाषा के विभिन्न रूपों में जानबूझकर लेक्सिकल अस्पष्टता का पता लगाने के एक सार्वभौमिक एल्गोरिथ्म के लिए हमारी खोज का वर्णन करता है। SemEval-2018 टास्क 3 में, हमने PunFields का उपयोग किया, अंग्रेजी puns के स्वचालित विश्लेषण की प्रणाली जिसे हमने SemEval-2017 में पेश किया था, ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए। प्रारंभिक परीक्षणों से पता चला है कि यह F1 = 0.596 के स्कोर तक पहुंच सकता है। हालांकि, प्रतियोगिता में, इसका परिणाम F1 = 0.549 था।', 'ru': 'В статье описан наш поиск универсального алгоритма выявления преднамеренной лексической двусмысленности в различных формах творческого языка. На SemEval-2018 Task 3 мы использовали PunFields, систему автоматического анализа английских каламбуров, которую мы представили на SemEval-2017, для обнаружения иронии в твитах. Предварительные тесты показали, что он может достичь балла F1=0,596. Однако на конкурсе его результат был F1=0,549.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar cur síos ar ár gcuardach ar algartam uilíoch chun débhríocht fhoclóra d’aon ghnó a bhrath i bhfoirmeacha éagsúla teanga chruthaitheach. Ag Tasc 3 SemEval-2018, d’úsáideamar PunFields, an córas um anailís uathoibríoch ar phunanna Béarla a thugamar isteach ag SemEval-2017, chun íoróin a bhrath i dtvuíteanna. Léirigh na réamhthástálacha gur féidir leis an scór F1=0.596 a bhaint amach. Ag an gcomórtas, áfach, ba é an toradh a bhí air ná F1=0.549.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი საქაღალდე უნივერსოლური ალგორიტიმის ძება, რომელიც საკუთარი ლექსიკალური ამბიდვიტის განსხვავებული ფორმებში კრეატიგური ენაზე განახსნა. SemEval-2018 სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალებში ჩვენ PunFields-ს გამოყენეთ, ანგლისური პონტის ავტომატური ანალიზაციის სისტემა, რომელიც ჩვენ SemEval-2017-ში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩ პირველი ტესტი გამოჩნდა, რომ ეს შეიძლება მიიღოთ F1=0.596. მაგრამ კონკრენტებში, მისი შედეგი იყო F1=0,549.', 'el': 'Η εργασία περιγράφει την αναζήτησή μας για έναν καθολικό αλγόριθμο ανίχνευσης σκόπιμης λεξικής ασάφειας σε διάφορες μορφές δημιουργικής γλώσσας. Στην εργασία 3, χρησιμοποιήσαμε το σύστημα αυτόματης ανάλυσης των αγγλικών λογοπαίγνιων που παρουσιάσαμε στο για να εντοπίσουμε την ειρωνεία στα tweets. Προκαταρκτικές δοκιμές έδειξαν ότι μπορεί να φτάσει στο σκορ F1=0.596. Ωστόσο, στο διαγωνισμό, το αποτέλεσμα του ήταν F1=0.549.', 'kk': 'Қағаз біздің іздеуді жалпы құрастырушы тілдер түрлі түрлерінде анықтау үшін әлемдік алгоритмді анықтайды. SemEval-2018 3- тапсырмасында біз PunFields- ді автоматты түрде анализ жүйесі, біз SemEval-2017 жылы келтірілген ағылшын тізбектерінің ағылшын тізбектерінің ирониясын табу үшін қолдандық. Алдыңғы сынақтар F1=0, 596 нәтижесін жеткізуге болады. Бірақ конкурстың нәтижесі F1=0,549.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány egy olyan univerzális algoritmus keresését írja le, amely a kreatív nyelv különböző formáinak szándékos lexikai kétértelműségét felismeri. A SemEval-2018 Task 3-on a PunFields-et, az angol szójátékok automatikus elemzésének rendszerét használtuk, amelyet a SemEval-2017-en vezettünk be, hogy felismerjük az iróniát a tweetekben. Az előzetes tesztek azt mutatták, hogy elérheti az F1=0,596 pontszámot. A versenyen azonban F1=0,549 volt az eredmény.', 'it': "L'articolo descrive la nostra ricerca di un algoritmo universale per rilevare l'ambiguità lessicale intenzionale in diverse forme di linguaggio creativo. A SemEval-2018 Task 3, abbiamo utilizzato PunFields, il sistema di analisi automatica dei giochi di parole inglesi che abbiamo introdotto a SemEval-2017, per rilevare l'ironia nei tweet. Test preliminari hanno dimostrato che può raggiungere il punteggio di F1=0,596. Tuttavia, alla competizione, il suo risultato è stato F1=0,549.", 'lt': 'Dokumente apibūdinama mūsų paieška universalaus algoritmo, skirto tyčiniam leksiniam dviprasmiškumui nustatyti įvairiomis kūrybinės kalbos formomis. SemEval-2018 3 užduotyje mes panaudojome PunFields, anglų punų automatinės analizės sistemą, kurią įvedėme SemEval-2017, siekiant nustatyti ironiją tweetuose. Išankstiniai tyrimai parodė, kad jis gali pasiekti F1 = 0,596. Tačiau konkurso metu rezultatas buvo F1 = 0,549.', 'mk': 'Во весникот се опишува нашата потрага по универзален алгоритм за откривање намерна лексикална нејасност во различни форми на креативен јазик. На SemEval-2018 задача 3, го користевме PunFields, системот на автоматска анализа на англиски puns што го претставивме во SemEval-2017, за да откриеме иронија на твитови. Прелиминарните тестови покажаа дека може да постигне резултат на F1=0,596. Сепак, на натпреварот, нејзиниот резултат беше F1=0,549.', 'ms': 'The paper describes our search for a universal algorithm of detecting intentional lexical ambiguity in different forms of creative language.  Pada SemEval-2018 Task 3, kami menggunakan PunFields, sistem analisis automatik puns Inggeris yang kami perkenalkan di SemEval-2017, untuk mengesan ironi dalam tweet. Ujian awal menunjukkan bahawa ia boleh mencapai skor F1=0.596. Namun, pada pertandingan, hasilnya F1=0.549.', 'ml': 'പേപ്പറിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികളില്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിയായ ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിനെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ തെരച്ചി സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 3-ല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പുന്\u200dഫീല്\u200dഡുകളെ ഉപയോഗിച്ചു, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പാണ്ടുകളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം ആന്\u200dട്രിക്കല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല ആദ്യ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് F1=0. 596 സ്കോര്\u200d എത്താന്\u200d കഴിയുമെന്ന് കാണിച്ചു. എന്നാലും അതിന്റെ ഫലം F1=0.549 ആയിരുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас биднийг бүтээлч хэлний өөр хэлбэрүүдийн зорилготой хэлбэрийг олох универсал алгоритмыг тайлбарладаг. SemEval-2018 Task 3 дээр бид PunFields-г автоматжуулан Англи хэлний шинжилгээний систем SemEval-2017 онд танилцуулсан, tweets дээр гайхамшигтай байдлыг олж мэдсэн. Эхлээд шалгалт нь F1=0.596 тооны хүртэл хүрэх боломжтой гэдгийг харуулсан. Гэхдээ өрсөлдөөнд F1=0.549 үр дүн гарсан.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano nasze poszukiwania uniwersalnego algorytmu wykrywania intencyjnej dwuznaczności leksykalnej w różnych formach języka twórczego. W SemEval-2018 Task 3 wykorzystaliśmy PunFields, system automatycznej analizy angielskich gier słownych, który wprowadziliśmy na SemEval-2017, aby wykryć ironię w tweetach. Wstępne testy wykazały, że może osiągnąć wynik F1=0,596. Jednak na zawodach jej wynikiem było F1=0.549.', 'no': 'Papiret beskriver søket vårt etter ein universel algoritme for å finna vilkårleg leksisk ambiguitet i ulike formar av kreativ språk. På semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3 brukte vi PunFields, systemet med automatisk analyse av engelske punt som vi introdusere på semiEval-2017 for å oppdaga irony i tweets. F1=0,596 På konkurransen var imidlertid resultatet F1 = 0,549.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea descrie căutarea unui algoritm universal de detectare a ambiguității lexicale intenționate în diferite forme de limbaj creativ. La SemEval-2018 Task 3, am folosit PunFields, sistemul de analiză automată a jocurilor de cuvinte engleze pe care l-am introdus la SemEval-2017, pentru a detecta ironia în tweet-uri. Testele preliminare au arătat că poate atinge scorul F1=0,596. Cu toate acestea, la competiție, rezultatul său a fost F1=0,549.', 'mt': 'Il-karta tiddeskrivi t-tfittxija tagħna għal algoritmu universali biex tinstab ambigwità lexika intenzjonata f’forom differenti ta’ lingwa kreattiva. Fis-SemEval-2018 Task 3, użajna PunFields, is-sistema ta’ analiżi awtomatika tal-puns Ingliżi li introduċejna fis-SemEval-2017, biex niskopru l-ironija fit-tweets. It-testijiet preliminari wrew li jista’ jilħaq il-punteġġ ta’ F1=0.596. Madankollu, fil-kompetizzjoni, ir-riżultat tiegħu kien F1=0.549.', 'sr': 'U novinama opisuje našu potragu za univerzalnim algoritmom otkrivanja namernog leksičkog ambiguiteta u različitim oblicima kreativnog jezika. Na zadatku 3. iz semiEvala-2018, koristili smo PunFields, sistem automatske analize engleskih punova koje smo upoznali na semiEval-2017, kako bi otkrili ironiju u tweetima. Preliminarni testi pokazali su da može doći do rezultata F1=0,596. Međutim, na konkurenciji, njegov rezultat je bio F1=0,549.', 'si': 'පැත්තේ අපේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ භාෂාවේ වෙනස් වර්ගයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාව හොයාගන්න සා සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 3දී, අපි පුන්ෆිල්ඩ්ස්ව භාවිතා කරනවා, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පොන්ස්ට් වල ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විශ්ලේෂණ පද්ධතිය, අපි සෙ මුලින් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට F1=0.596 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. නමුත්, ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන්, ඒකේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය F1=0,549.', 'so': 'Qoraalka ayaa ku qoran baaraandegista qoraalka caalamiga ah oo ku ogaashada dhaqdhaqaaqa qasabka ah oo ku qoran noocyo kala duduwan oo af abuurid ah. Shaqada 3 ee SemEval-2018 ayaannu ku isticmaalnay PunFields, nidaamka kooxaha afka Ingiriiska ee aan ku soo bandhignay SemEval-2017, si aan labada tweetka ku ogaano irolo. Imtixaanka hore waxay caddaysay in ay gaadhi karto imtixaanka F1=0.596. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qashinku waxay noqotay F1=0,549.', 'sv': 'Uppsatsen beskriver vårt sökande efter en universell algoritm för att upptäcka avsiktlig lexikal tvetydighet i olika former av kreativt språk. På SemEval-2018 Task 3 använde vi PunFields, systemet för automatisk analys av engelska ordspel som vi introducerade på SemEval-2017, för att upptäcka ironi i tweets. Preliminära tester visade att den kan nå betyget F1=0,596. Vid tävlingen blev resultatet dock F1=0,549.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் எங்கள் தேடுதல் பொதுவான மொழியை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பொருட்களை விளக்குகிறது. செம்Eval-2018 பணி 3-ல், நாங்கள் புன் பீல்ட்ஸ், ஆங்கிலத்தின் தானாக ஆராய்ச்சி அமைப்பு, நாங்கள் செம்Eval-2017-ல் கண்டுபிடித்துக் கொண்டிருந்தோ முன்னிருப்பு சோதனைகள் F1=0. 596 என்பதை காண்பித்தது. ஆனால், போட்டியில், அதன் முடிவு F1=0.549.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ مختلف طریقوں میں مختلف خلقت کی زبان کی مختلف طریقوں میں ہماری تلاش کی ایک عمومی الگوریتم کے لئے بیان کرتا ہے. SemEval-2018 Task 3 میں ہم PunFields کو استعمال کیا کرتے تھے، انگلیسی پانٹوں کی اتمام تحلیل کا سیستم جس کو ہم نے SemEval-2017 میں پہنچایا تھا، ٹویٹوں میں ایرونی پتچانے کے لئے۔ پہلی آزمائش نے دکھائی کہ یہ F1=0.596 کا سکوٹ پہنچ سکتا ہے. However, at the competition, its result was F1=0.549.', 'uz': "Qogʻoz bizning qidirish umumiy algoritni ko'rsatishimizni boshqa shakllarda ijodkorlik tilida ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. SemEval-2018 Vazifa 3 da, biz Twitterda ironi aniqlashga avtomatik o'rganish ingliz punktlarning tizimi PunFieldlardan foydalanamiz. Birinchi sinovlar F1=0. 596 scorini olish mumkin. Lekin, qidirishda natijasi F1=0.549 edi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy mô tả sự tìm kiếm của chúng ta về thuật toán phổ biến trinh sát khả năng ngôn ngữ có chủ ý trong các dạng khác nhau của ngôn ngữ sáng tạo. Tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-thẩm 8 3, chúng tôi dùng PunFields, hệ thống phân tích tự động của môn chơi chữ tiếng Anh mà chúng tôi đã giới thiệu ở SemEvol, để phát hiện sự trớ trêu trên Twitter. Những xét nghiệm sơ bộ cho thấy nó có thể đạt được điểm số F1=0.596. Kết quả của cuộc thi là F1=0.599.', 'bg': 'Статията описва нашето търсене на универсален алгоритъм за откриване на умишлена лексикална двусмисленост в различни форми на творчески език. В задача 3 използвахме системата за автоматичен анализ на английски думи, която въведохме в системата за откриване на ирония в туитове. Предварителните тестове показаха, че тя може да достигне резултата от Ф1=0.596. В състезанието обаче резултатът му е Формула=0.549.', 'da': 'Artiklen beskriver vores søgen efter en universel algoritme til at detektere forsætlig leksikal tvetydighed i forskellige former for kreativt sprog. På SemEval-2018 Task 3 brugte vi PunFields, systemet til automatisk analyse af engelske ordspil, som vi introducerede på SemEval-2017, til at opdage ironi i tweets. Indledende test viste, at det kan nå scoren på F1=0,596. Men ved konkurrencen var resultatet F1=0,549.', 'de': 'Der Beitrag beschreibt unsere Suche nach einem universellen Algorithmus zur Erkennung intentionaler lexikalischer Ambiguität in verschiedenen Formen kreativer Sprache. Bei SemEval-2018 Task 3 haben wir PunFields verwendet, das System der automatischen Analyse englischer Wortspiele, das wir auf SemEval-2017 eingeführt haben, um Ironie in Tweets zu erkennen. Vorläufige Tests zeigten, dass es die Punktzahl von F1=0,596 erreichen kann. Das Ergebnis war jedoch F1=0.549.', 'id': 'Kertas menggambarkan pencarian kita untuk algoritma universal untuk mendeteksi ambiguitas lexik sengaja dalam bentuk berbeda bahasa kreatif. Di SemEval-2018 Task 3, kami menggunakan PunFields, sistem analisis otomatis dari puns Inggris yang kami perkenalkan di SemEval-2017, untuk mendeteksi ironi dalam tweet. Tes awal menunjukkan bahwa dapat mencapai skor F1=0,596. However, at the competition, its result was F1=0.549.', 'nl': 'Het artikel beschrijft onze zoektocht naar een universeel algoritme voor het detecteren van intentionele lexicale ambiguïteit in verschillende vormen van creatieve taal. Bij SemEval-2018 Task 3 gebruikten we PunFields, het systeem van automatische analyse van Engelse woordspelingen dat we introduceerden op SemEval-2017, om ironie in tweets te detecteren. Voorlopige tests toonden aan dat het de score van F1=0.596 kan bereiken. Bij de wedstrijd was het resultaat echter F1=0.549.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ دنبال الگوریتم جهانی ما را توصیف می\u200cکند که در شکل\u200cهای مختلف زبان خلاقی کشف کردن غیرقابل تعریف زبان فکری است. در کار سوم Eval-2018، از پنفیلدز استفاده کردیم، سیستم تحلیل خودکار انگلیسی که در سیم Eval-2017 معرفی کردیم، برای شناسایی مسخره در تویتها استفاده کردیم. آزمایش پیشینی نشان داد که می\u200cتواند به امتیاز F1=0.596 رسید. ولی در مسابقه، نتیجه F1=0.549 بود.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 서로 다른 형식의 창조적 언어에서 의도적인 어휘의 잘못된 뜻을 검출하는 통용 알고리즘을 찾는 것을 묘사한다.SemEval-18퀘스트3에서 우리는 PunFields(우리가 SemEval-2017에 도입한 영어 쌍관어 자동 분석 시스템)를 사용하여 추문의 반풍을 측정한다.초보적인 테스트에서 그 F1=0.596점을 나타냈다.그러나 경기에서는 F1=0.549의 결과가 나왔다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linaelezea utafutaji wetu wa ulimwengu wa kutafuta uchochezi wa kimapenzi katika a in a mbalimbali ya lugha ya ubunifu. Katika Task 3 ya SemEval-2018, tulitumia PunFields, mfumo wa uchambuzi wa faragha wa punguzi za Kiingereza ambazo tulianzisha SemEval-2017, ili kutambua kejeli katika twiti. Majaribio ya awali yalionyesha kuwa inaweza kufikia kiwango cha F1=0.596. Hata hivyo, katika mashindano hayo, matokeo yake yalikuwa F1=0.549.', 'af': "Die papier beskryf ons soek vir 'n universele algoritme van die ontdekking van intensionale leksiese onbedienheid in verskillende vorms van kreatiewe taal. By SemEval-2018 Taak 3, het ons PunFields gebruik, die stelsel van outomatiese analisie van Engelske punte wat ons in SemEval-2017 aangedoen het om ironie in tweets te beskry. Vorige toets vertoon dat dit kan bereik die telling van F1=0. 596. Maar by die mededing, was sy resultaat F1=0,549.", 'sq': 'Gazeta përshkruan kërkimin tonë për një algoritëm universal të zbulimit të dyshimtës lexike me qëllim në forme të ndryshme të gjuhës krijuese. Në SemEval-2018 Task 3, ne përdorëm PunFields, sistemin e analizës automatike të punëve angleze që futëm në SemEval-2017, për të zbuluar ironinë në tweet. Testet paraprake treguan se mund të arrijë rezultatin e F1=0.596. Megjithatë, në konkurrencë, rezultati i saj ishte F1=0.549.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz biziň gözlemegimizi döredijili dilleriň beýleki şeklinde gözlemegimizi algoritidir. SemEval-2018 Görevde 3-nji Görevde PunFields'i, iňlisçe taýýarlaryň awtomatik analysi sistemasyny SemEval-2017'da tanyşdyrdyk we gürrüňleri týuterde tapmak üçin ulandyk. Öňki synaglar F1=0.596 sany ýetişip biljekdigini görkezildi. Ýöne, ýaryşykda netijesi F1=0,549.", 'az': "Kağıt bizim üniversal algoritimizi yaradıcı dilin müxtəlif şəkildə niyyətli dili təşkil etmək üçün təşkil edir. SemEval-2018 Task 3'də, biz PunFields'i, SemEval-2017'də tanıdığımız İngilizə punların otomatik analizi sistemini, tweetlərdə ironi keşfetmek üçün istifadə etdik. Önceki sınamalar F1=0,596 nöqtəsinə yetişə biləcəyini göstərdi. Lakin, müharibədə, sonuç F1=0,549 idi.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি বিভিন্ন ধরনের সৃষ্টিশীল ভাষায় আমাদের অনুসন্ধানের বিশ্বব্যাপী অ্যালগরিদম খুঁজে বের করেছে। সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩-এ আমরা পুনফিল্ড ব্যবহার করেছিলাম, যা ইংরেজী পানের স্বয়ংক্রিয় বিশ্লেষণের ব্যবস্থা, যা আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৭ এ পরিচয় করেছিলা প্রাথমিক পরীক্ষা দেখা যায় যে এটি F1=0.596 এর স্কোর পৌঁছাতে পারে। তবে প্রতিযোগিতায় এফ১=০.৫৪।', 'hr': 'U novinama opisuje našu potragu za univerzalnim algoritmom otkrivanja namjerne leksičke ambiguitete u različitim oblicima kreativnog jezika. Na zadatku 3. na semiEval-2018, koristili smo PunFields, sistem automatske analize engleskih udara koje smo upoznali na semiEval-2017, kako bi otkrili ironiju u tweetima. Preliminarni testi pokazali su da može doći do rezultata F1=0,596. Međutim, na natjecanju, njegov rezultat je bio F1=0,549.', 'am': 'የፕሬዝዳንት መልዕክት በተለያዩ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ውስጥ የፍላጎት አሌጎርቲምን ለማግኘት የሚሻለውን ፍለጋችን ይናገራል፡፡ በSemEval-2018 ስራ 3፣ የኢንግሊዝኛ ግንኙነት አካባቢ አፍሪካዊ ግንኙነትን ለማግኘት የፖነቲካዊ ግንኙነት አካባቢ አካባቢ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ፈተናዎች F1=0.596 ሊደርስ ይችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ፍሬው F1=0.549 ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'U novinama opisuje našu potragu za univerzalnim algoritmom otkrivanja namjerne leksičke ambiguitete u različitim oblicima kreativnog jezika. Na zadatku 3. na semiEval-2018, koristili smo PunFields, sistem automatske analize engleskih punika koje smo upoznali na semiEval-2017, kako bi otkrili ironiju u tweetima. Preliminarni testi pokazali su da može doći do rezultata F1=0,596. Međutim, na konkurenciji, njegov rezultat je bio F1=0,549.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին նկարագրում է մեր որոնումը համընդհանուր ալգորիթմ, որը կբացահայտի մտավոր լեքսիկական բացահայտությունը ստեղծագործական լեզվի տարբեր ձևերում: ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի 3-րդ հանձնարարության ժամանակ մենք օգտագործեցինք Պունֆիլդսը, անգլերենի խմբերի ավտոմատիկ վերլուծության համակարգը, որը մենք ներկայացրեցինք ՍեմԷվալ 2017-ին, որպեսզի հայտնաբերենք թվիթերում հեգնությամբ: Առաջին փորձարկումները ցույց տվեցին, որ այն կարող է հասնել F1-ի գնահատականին՝ 0,59: Այնուամենայնիվ, մրցակցության ժամանակ դրա արդյունքը F1=0.549 էր:', 'et': 'Töös kirjeldatakse meie otsingut universaalse algoritmi leidmiseks tahtliku leksikaalse ebaselguse tuvastamiseks loomingulise keele erinevates vormides. SemEval-2018 ülesandes 3 kasutasime punkFieldsi, inglise sõnamängude automaatse analüüsi süsteemi, mida tutvustasime SemEval-2017, iroonia tuvastamiseks säutsudes. Esialgsed testid näitasid, et see võib jõuda punktini F1=0,596. Kuid võistlusel oli selle tulemus F1=0,549.', 'cs': 'Článek popisuje naše hledání univerzálního algoritmu detekce záměrné lexikální nejednoznačnosti v různých formách tvůrčího jazyka. Na SemEval-2018 Task 3 jsme použili PunFields, systém automatické analýzy anglických hříček, který jsme představili na SemEval-2017, k detekci ironie ve tweetech. Předběžné testy ukázaly, že může dosáhnout skóre F1=0,596. V soutěži však jeho výsledkem byl F1=0.549.', 'fi': 'Artikkeli kuvaa hakuamme universaaliin algoritmiin tarkoituksellisen sanamuodon epämääräisyyden havaitsemiseksi luovan kielen eri muodoissa. SemEval-2018 Task 3:ssa käytimme SemEval-2017:ssa esiteltyä englanninkielisten sanasanojen automaattista analyysijärjestelmää PunFields-järjestelmällä, joka havaitsee ironian twiitteissä. Alustavat testit osoittivat, että se voi saavuttaa pisteen F1 = 0,596. Kilpailun tulos oli kuitenkin F1=0,549.', 'ca': "El paper descriu la nostra búsqueda d'un algoritme universal de detectar ambigüitat lexical intencional en diferents formes de llenguatge creativ. A SemEval-2018 Task 3 vam utilitzar PunFields, el sistema d'anàlisi automàtica dels puns anglesos que vam introduir a SemEval-2017, per detectar ironia en els tweets. Els exàmens preliminars van demostrar que pot arribar a la puntuació de F1=0,596. Però en la competició, el seu result at era F1=0,549.", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Nang semebal-2013 task 3, kita gambar Pun Test Wacom last Nanging, njuk, sawaliké saka F1=0.589.', 'he': 'העיתון מתאר את החיפוש שלנו לאלגוריתם אוניברסלי של גילוי סביבות לקסית בכוונה בצורות שונות של שפה יצירתית. במשימה שלישית SemEval-2018, השתמשנו בפאנפילדס, מערכת הניתוח האוטומטי של פאנקים אנגליים שהציגנו ב SemEval-2017, כדי לגלות אירוניה בטוויטים. בדיקות קודמיות הראו שהוא יכול להגיע לתוצאה של F1=0.596. עם זאת, בתחרות התוצאה הייתה F1=0.549.', 'ha': "Kayan karatun na faɗa ɗa Search for a universal algoritm of the gane ambiguity of delicate lex in some form of Creative language. Daga SemEl-2018 Taimar 3, mun yi amfani da PunFifield, na'urar anayyar farat ɗaya na masu bastarwa na Ingiriya wanda muka nuna da shi a SemEl-2017, dõmin ya gane kino a cikin Twitter. Tafiyar da farko ya nuna cewa yana iya kai matsayin F1=0.596. Kayya, a cikin shirin, matsayinta ya kasance F1=0,549.", 'sk': 'Prispevek opisuje naše iskanje univerzalnega algoritma za odkrivanje namerne leksikalne dvoumnosti v različnih oblikah ustvarjalnega jezika. Na SemEval-2018 Task 3 smo uporabili PunFields, sistem avtomatske analize angleških besednih besed, ki smo ga uvedli na SemEval-2017, za odkrivanje ironije v tweetih. Predhodni testi so pokazali, da lahko doseže rezultat F1 = 0,596. Na tekmovanju je bil rezultat F1=0,549.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་སྣང་མེད་དུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་། SemEval-2018 ལས་ཀ་གསུམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་PunFields(PunFields)ནང་དུ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་གནད་ཁོངས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཡིན། རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་པས་F1=0.596 རིམ་ཚད་ལྷག་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། དཀའ་ངལ་འབྱོར་གྱིས་F 1=0.549 རེད།'}
{'en': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'ar': 'HashCount في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: التخصيص المتسلسل للتغريد والهاشتاقات للكشف عن المفارقة', 'es': 'HashCount en SemEval-2018 Tarea 3: Característica concatenativa de Tweets y Hashtags para la detección de ironía', 'fr': "HashCount au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Fonctionnalisation concaténative de Tweets et de Hashtags pour la détection de l'ironie", 'pt': 'HashCount na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Caracterização Concatenativa de Tweet e Hashtags para Detecção de Ironia', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク3のハッシュカウント：アイロニー検出のためのツイートとハッシュタグの連結機能化', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务3HashCount:推文与题连续性特征化,以刺检也', 'ru': 'HashCount на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Конкатенативная функциональность твитов и хештегов для обнаружения иронии', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर HashCount: विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए ट्वीट और हैशटैग की Concatenative विशेषता', 'ga': 'HashCount ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Gné-Fhairsingiú Comhtháite ar Tweet agus Hashtags chun Iarann a Bhrath', 'ka': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'hu': 'HashCount a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Tweet és Hashtagok összefüggő megjelenítése az irónia felismeréséhez', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Συγκεντρωτική αξιοποίηση του tweets και των hashtags για την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας', 'it': "HashCount al SemEval-2018 Task 3: Featurizzazione concatenativa di Tweet e Hashtag per il rilevamento dell'ironia", 'kk': 'HashCount at semiEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'mk': 'HashCount на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Контактивна фигуризација на Твит и Hashtags за идентификација на иронија', 'lt': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'ms': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'mt': 'HashCount f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 3: Featurizzazzjoni Konġunta ta’ Tweet u Hashtags għall-Iskopri tal-Ironja', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ ഹഷ്ക്കൌണ്ട്: ഇറോണി ഡിറ്ററിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ട്വീറ്റിന്റെയും ഹാഷ്ടാഗുകളുടെയും കോണ്\u200dക്കാന', 'mn': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'pl': 'HashCount w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Konkatenatywna funkcjonowanie tweetów i hashtagów do wykrywania ironii', 'ro': 'HashCount la SemEval-2018 Task 3: Featurizarea concatenativă a Tweet-urilor și Hashtags-urilor pentru detectarea ironiei', 'no': 'HashCount at semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'sr': 'HashCount na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Koncentracivna funkcionacija Tweeta i Hashtaga za detekciju Ironija', 'si': 'HashCount at semeval-2018 Job 3: ConcConcentrate Featurizing of Tweet and Hashtags for Iron Detection', 'so': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Detection of Ironium', 'sv': 'HashCount på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Konatenativ Featurisering av Tweet och Hashtags för Irony Detection', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் ஹாஷ்Count 3: Iron Detection for Concatenative Featuration of Tweet and Hashtags', 'ur': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đức Chúa trời ở SemEvol-208 Task 3: Buổi thực tập kết nối cho phần trinh sát', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Съвпадение на туит и хаштагове за откриване на ирония', 'nl': 'HashCount bij SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Concatenatieve Featurisatie van Tweet en Hashtags voor Ironie Detectie', 'da': 'HashCount på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Concatenativ Featurisering af Tweet og Hashtags til Irony Detection', 'hr': 'HashCount na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Koncentrativna funkcija Tweeta i Hashtaga za detekciju željeza', 'de': 'HashCount bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Konkatenative Featurisierung von Tweet und Hashtags zur Ironie Detektion', 'id': 'HashCount di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Featureization Concatenative of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'ko': 'SemEval-2018의 HashCount 작업 3: 트위터와 탭의 직렬 특징화, 역설 검출에 사용', 'fa': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'sw': 'HashCount kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Utamaduni wa Twita na Hashtags kwa ajili ya Kutambua Uholanzi', 'tr': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'af': 'HashCount by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'am': 'ሐሽCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featuritation of Tweet and Hashtags for Iron Detection', 'hy': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'sq': 'HashCount në SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'az': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩: ইরোনি সনাক্তির জন্য টুইট এবং হ্যাশট্যাগের কন্টারেটিভ বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'bs': 'HashCount na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Koncentrativna funkcija Tweeta i Hashtaga za detekciju željeza', 'ca': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Konkatenativní funkčnost tweetu a hashtagů pro detekci ironie', 'et': 'HashCount SemEval-2018 ülesandel 3: Tweet ja Hashtagi konkatenatiivne kasutamine iroonia tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'HashCount SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Tweet- ja Hashtagien yhdistäminen ironian havaitsemiseen', 'jv': 'hashcount at semi-2008 task 3', 'sk': 'HashCount na SemEval-2018 naloga 3: Konatenativna featurizacija Tweet in Hashtags za odkrivanje ironije', 'ha': 'Count at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 3: Concatenative Featurization of Twitter and Hashtags for Iron Finding', 'he': 'HashCount ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: תאריך משותף של טוויט ו Hashtags לגלות אירוניה', 'bo': 'HashCount at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Concatenative Featurization of Tweet and Hashtags for Irony Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes a novel feature extraction process for SemEval task 3 : Irony detection in English tweets. The proposed system incorporates a concatenative featurization of tweet and hashtags, which helps distinguishing between the irony-related and the other components. The system embeds tweets into a vector sequence with widely used pretrained word vectors, partially using a character embedding for the words that are out of vocabulary. Identification was performed with BiLSTM and CNN classifiers, achieving F1 score of 0.5939 (23/42) and 0.3925 (10/28) each for the binary and the multi-class case, respectively. The reliability of the proposed scheme was verified by analyzing the Gold test data, which demonstrates how hashtags can be taken into account when identifying various types of irony.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة عملية استخراج ميزة جديدة لمهمة SemEval 3: الكشف عن المفارقة في التغريدات الإنجليزية. يشتمل النظام المقترح على سمة متسلسلة للتغريدات وعلامات التصنيف ، مما يساعد على التمييز بين المكونات المتعلقة بالمفارقة والمكونات الأخرى. يقوم النظام بتضمين التغريدات في تسلسل متجه مع متجهات كلمات مستخدمة على نطاق واسع ، وذلك جزئيًا باستخدام تضمين حرف للكلمات التي لا تحتوي على مفردات. تم إجراء التحديد باستخدام مصنفات BiLSTM و CNN ، وحققت درجة F1 من 0.5939 (23/42) و 0.3925 (10/28) لكل حالة ثنائية ومتعددة الفئات ، على التوالي. تم التحقق من موثوقية المخطط المقترح من خلال تحليل بيانات اختبار الذهب ، والتي توضح كيف يمكن أخذ علامات التصنيف في الاعتبار عند تحديد أنواع مختلفة من المفارقة.', 'es': 'Este artículo propone un novedoso proceso de extracción de características para la tarea 3 de SemEval: Detección de ironía en tuits en inglés. El sistema propuesto incorpora una característica concatenativa de tuits y hashtags, lo que ayuda a distinguir entre los componentes relacionados con la ironía y los demás componentes. El sistema incorpora tuits en una secuencia vectorial con vectores de palabras preentrenados ampliamente utilizados, utilizando parcialmente una incrustación de caracteres para las palabras que están fuera del vocabulario. La identificación se realizó con clasificadores BilsTM y CNN, logrando una puntuación F1 de 0.5939 (23/42) y 0.3925 (10/28) cada uno para el caso binario y multiclase, respectivamente. La fiabilidad del esquema propuesto se verificó mediante el análisis de los datos de la prueba Gold, que demuestra cómo se pueden tener en cuenta los hashtags a la hora de identificar varios tipos de ironía.', 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe um novo processo de extração de recursos para a tarefa 3 do SemEval: detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês. O sistema proposto incorpora uma caracterização concatenativa de tweets e hashtags, o que ajuda a distinguir entre os componentes relacionados à ironia e os demais. O sistema incorpora tweets em uma sequência de vetores com vetores de palavras pré-treinados amplamente usados, usando parcialmente uma incorporação de caracteres para as palavras que estão fora do vocabulário. A identificação foi realizada com os classificadores BiLSTM e CNN, obtendo-se pontuação F1 de 0,5939 (23/42) e 0,3925 (10/28) cada para o caso binário e multiclasse, respectivamente. A confiabilidade do esquema proposto foi verificada por meio da análise dos dados do teste Gold, que demonstra como as hashtags podem ser levadas em consideração na identificação de diversos tipos de ironia.', 'fr': "Cet article propose un nouveau processus d'extraction de fonctionnalités pour la tâche 3 de SemEval\xa0: Détection de l'ironie dans les tweets anglais. Le système proposé intègre une fonctionnalité concaténative de tweets et de hashtags, ce qui permet de faire la distinction entre les composants liés à l'ironie et les autres composants. Le système intègre des tweets dans une séquence vectorielle avec des vecteurs de mots préentraînés largement utilisés, en utilisant partiellement une incorporation de caractères pour les mots qui ne sont pas dans le vocabulaire. L'identification a été effectuée avec les classificateurs BilsTM et CNN, obtenant un score F1 de 0,5939 (23/42) et 0,3925 (10/28) chacun pour le cas binaire et le cas multi-classe, respectivement. La fiabilité du schéma proposé a été vérifiée en analysant les données du test Gold, qui montrent comment les hashtags peuvent être pris en compte lors de l'identification de divers types d'ironie.", 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval कार्य 3 के लिए एक उपन्यास सुविधा निष्कर्षण प्रक्रिया का प्रस्ताव करता है: अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाना। प्रस्तावित प्रणाली में ट्वीट और हैशटैग की एक संयोजनात्मक विशेषता शामिल है, जो विडंबना से संबंधित और अन्य घटकों के बीच अंतर करने में मदद करती है। सिस्टम व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले प्रीट्रेन्ड शब्द वैक्टर के साथ एक वेक्टर अनुक्रम में ट्वीट्स को एम्बेड करता है, आंशिक रूप से शब्दावली से बाहर के शब्दों के लिए एक चरित्र एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करता है। पहचान BiLSTM और CNN क्लासिफायरके साथ किया गया था, जो क्रमशः बाइनरी और मल्टी-क्लास केस के लिए प्रत्येक 0.5939 (23/42) और 0.3925 (10/28) के F1 स्कोर को प्राप्त करता है। प्रस्तावित योजना की विश्वसनीयता को गोल्ड परीक्षण डेटा का विश्लेषण करके सत्यापित किया गया था, जो दर्शाता है कि विभिन्न प्रकार की विडंबनाओं की पहचान करते समय हैशटैग को कैसे ध्यान में रखा जा सकता है।', 'ja': '本論文では、英語のツイートにおけるSemEvalタスク3: Irony検出のための新規機能抽出プロセスを提案している。提案されたシステムには、ツイートとハッシュタグの連結機能が組み込まれており、皮肉に関連するコンポーネントと他のコンポーネントの区別に役立ちます。このシステムは、広く使用されている事前に訓練された単語ベクトルを備えたベクトルシーケンスにツイートを埋め込み、部分的には語彙から外れている単語の文字埋め込みを使用する。ＢｉＬＳＴＭ及びＣＮＮ分類子を用いて同定を行い、バイナリ及びマルチクラスケースについてそれぞれ０ ． ５ ９ ３ ９ （ ２ ３ ／ ４ ２ ）及び０ ． ３ ９ ２ ５ （ １ ０ ／ ２ ８ ）のＦ１スコアを達成した。提案されたスキームの信頼性は、様々なタイプの皮肉を識別する際にハッシュタグを考慮する方法を示すGoldテストデータを分析することによって検証されました。', 'zh': '本文举SemEval务3:英语推讽刺性检新颖。 议统合推文连特征化,所以助分刺之组件组件也。 其统将推文嵌入广用预训练词向量向量序中,分用字符嵌词汇表中单词。 以BiLSTMCNN之器识之,二进制与多类之分得0.5939(23/42)、0.3925(10/28)之F1评分。 析Gold测试数据验其可靠性,数征其识各种类型之刺,何以虑主。', 'ru': 'В этой статье предлагается новый процесс извлечения признаков для задачи SemEval 3: Обнаружение иронии в твитах на английском языке. Предлагаемая система включает в себя конкатенативную характеристику твитов и хэштегов, что помогает различать иронию и другие компоненты. Система встраивает твиты в векторную последовательность с широко используемыми предварительно обученными векторами слов, частично используя вложение символов для слов, которые выходят за пределы словарного запаса. Идентификацию проводили с помощью классификаторов BiLSTM и CNN, получая балл F1 0,5939 (23/42) и 0,3925 (10/28) соответственно для бинарного и многоклассового случая. Достоверность предложенной схемы была проверена путем анализа данных теста Gold, который демонстрирует, как хештеги могут учитываться при идентификации различных видов иронии.', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo próiseas eastósctha gné úrnua do thasc SemEval 3: Brath íoróin i dtvuíteanna Béarla. Ionchorpraíonn an córas atá beartaithe gné-alt comhchuingeach de thweet agus hashtags, rud a chabhraíonn le hidirdhealú a dhéanamh idir na comhpháirteanna a bhaineann leis an íoróin agus na comhpháirteanna eile. Leabaíonn an córas tweets i seicheamh veicteoireach le veicteoirí focal réamhthraenáilte a úsáidtear go forleathan, ag baint úsáide as leabú carachtar i bpáirt do na focail atá as stór focal. Rinneadh an t-aitheantas le haicmitheoirí BiLSTM agus CNN, ag baint amach scór F1 de 0.5939 (23/42) agus 0.3925 (10/28) an ceann don chás dénártha agus il-aicme, faoi seach. Fíoraíodh iontaofacht na scéime atá beartaithe trí anailís a dhéanamh ar shonraí na tástála Óir, a thaispeánann conas is féidir hashtags a chur san áireamh agus cineálacha éagsúla íoróin á sainaithint.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის პრომენტის გამოყენება SemEval სამუშაო დავალების პროცესი 3: ინგლისური tweets-ში იპრონიის განახლება. პროგრამეტული სისტემის კონტენენტიური ფუტურიზაცია, რომელიც იხმარებს იპონია და სხვა კონომპონენტების განსხვავება. Name იდენტიფიკაცია BiLSTM და CNN კლასიფიკაციებით გავაკეთებულია, რომელიც F1 წერტილი 0.5939 (23/42) და 0.3925 (10/28) ყოველთვის ბინარი და მრავალკლასის შემთხვევაში. პროგრამის სქემის დარწმუნებელობა შეიძლება დააწყენება, რომელიც დააწყენებს, როგორ ჰექტაქტები შეიძლება აღმოჩენოთ, როდესაც განსხვავებული თრონიის ტიპების განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια νέα διαδικασία εξαγωγής χαρακτηριστικών για την εργασία 3: ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα αγγλικά tweets. Το προτεινόμενο σύστημα ενσωματώνει μια αλληλουχητική χαρακτηριστικοποίηση tweet και hashtags, η οποία βοηθά στη διάκριση μεταξύ των σχετικών με την ειρωνεία και των άλλων συστατικών. Το σύστημα ενσωματώνει τα tweets σε μια διανυσματική ακολουθία με ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενα προ-εκπαιδευμένα διανύσματα λέξεων, εν μέρει χρησιμοποιώντας έναν χαρακτήρα που ενσωματώνει για τις λέξεις που δεν είναι λεξιλόγιο. Η ταυτοποίηση πραγματοποιήθηκε με ταξινομητές BiLSTM και CNN, επιτυγχάνοντας βαθμολογία F1 0.5939 (23/42) και 0.3925 (10/28) ο καθένας για τη δυαδική και την πολυκλασσική περίπτωση αντίστοιχα. Η αξιοπιστία του προτεινόμενου σχήματος επαληθεύτηκε με την ανάλυση των δεδομένων δοκιμής που δείχνουν πώς μπορούν να ληφθούν υπόψη τα hashtags κατά τον προσδιορισμό διαφόρων τύπων ειρωνείας.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új funkciókivonási eljárást javasol a SemEval 3. feladathoz: Irónia felismerése angol tweetekben. A javasolt rendszer magában foglalja a tweet és hashtag összefüggő jellemzőit, ami segít megkülönböztetni az iróniával kapcsolatos és a többi összetevőt. A rendszer a tweeteket vektoros sorrendbe ágyazza, széles körben használt előzetes szóvektorokkal, részben karakterek beágyazásával a szókincsen kívül eső szavakhoz. Az azonosítást BiLSTM és CNN osztályozókkal végeztük, amelyek F1 pontszáma 0,5939 (23/42) és 0,3925 (10/28) volt a bináris esetben, illetve a többosztályú esetben. A javasolt rendszer megbízhatóságát az Arany tesztadatok elemzésével ellenőriztük, amelyek azt mutatják, hogyan lehet figyelembe venni a hashtag-eket a különböző típusú irónia azonosításakor.', 'it': "Questo articolo propone un nuovo processo di estrazione delle funzionalità per SemEval task 3: Rilevazione dell'ironia nei tweet inglesi. Il sistema proposto incorpora una featurizzazione concatenativa di tweet e hashtag, che aiuta a distinguere tra l'ironia relativa e gli altri componenti. Il sistema incorpora i tweet in una sequenza vettoriale con vettori di parole pretrained ampiamente usati, in parte utilizzando un incorporamento di caratteri per le parole che sono fuori vocabolario. L'identificazione è stata eseguita con i classificatori BiLSTM e CNN, ottenendo un punteggio F1 di 0,5939 (23/42) e 0,3925 (10/28) ciascuno per il caso binario e multi-classe, rispettivamente. L'affidabilità dello schema proposto è stata verificata analizzando i dati Gold test, che dimostrano come gli hashtag possono essere presi in considerazione quando si identificano vari tipi di ironia.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз SemEval тапсырмасы 3- ге жаңа мүмкіндіктерді тарқату процесін ұсынады: Ағылшынша tweets тізімінде иронияны анықтау. Келтірілген жүйе тейтеттер мен хаттардың бірдей теңіздігін қолданады. Бұл irony- қатынастығы мен басқа компоненттер арасындағы айырмашылығын көмектеседі. Жүйелік сөздерден тыс сөздерді қолданатын вектор ретінде таңбаларды ендіреді. Бөлек сөздерден тыс сөздерді ендіру үшін таңбаларды қолданады. BiLSTM және CNN классификаторларымен идентификациялау орындалды. F1 нөмірі 0,5939 (23/42) және 0,3925 (10/28) екі класс мен көп класс үшін жеткізеді. Келтірілген сұлбаның сенімділігі алтын сынақтар деректерін анализ көмегімен тексерілді. Бұл әртүрлі irony түрлерін анықтағанда хаттарды қалай есептеу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'This paper proposes a novel feature extraction process for SemEval task 3: Irony detection in English tweets.  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ടൂട്ടിയും ഹാഷ്ട്ടാഗുകളുമായ ഒരു കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് പരിഹാസപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സെക്കന്റിലേക്കുള്ള ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസിലേക്ക് കയറ്റു ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റമും CNN ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫറുകളുമായി തിരിച്ചറിയിപ്പ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു. എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 5939 (23/42) പിന്നെ 0. 3925 (10/28) ബൈനറിയും പല പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പദ്ധതിയുടെ വിശ്വാസം സ്ഥിരപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഗോള്\u200dഡ് ടെസ്റ്റ് ഡേറ്റാകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlomas naujas SemEval 3 užduoties požymių gavimo procesas: ironijos aptikimas anglų tweetuose. Siūloma sistema apima trumpą tweeto ir hashtagų apibūdinimą, kuris padeda atskirti su ironija susijusias ir kitas sudedamąsias dalis. The system embeds tweets into a vector sequence with widely used pretrained word vectors, partially using a character embedding for the words that are out of vocabulary.  Nustatyta pagal BiLSTM ir CNN klasifikatorius, kurių F1 balas buvo atitinkamai 0,5939 (23/42) ir 0,3925 (10/28) dviejų ir daugiakalassių atvejų atveju. Siūlomos schemos patikimumas buvo patikrintas analizuojant aukso bandymų duomenis, kurie rodo, kaip galima atsižvelgti į hashtagus nustatant įvairių rūšių ironiją.', 'mk': 'Овој весник предлага процес на екстракција на нови карактеристики за SemEval задача 3: Детектирање на иронија на англиски твитови. Предложениот систем вклучува концентративна карактеризација на Твитер и хаштагови, што помага да се разликува меѓу иронијата и другите компоненти. Системот вградува твитови во векторна секвенца со широко употребени предобучени вектори на зборови, делумно користејќи знак вграден за зборовите кои се надвор од речникот. Идентификацијата беше извршена со класификаторите BiLSTM и CNN, достигнувајќи оценка F1 од 0,5939 (23/42) и 0,3925 (10/28) секој за бинарниот и мултикласниот случај, односно. Доверливоста на предложената шема беше верификувана со анализа на податоците од златниот тест, што покажува како може да се земат предвид хаштаговите кога се идентификуваат различни типови на иронија.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval даалгаварын 3-р шинэ шинэ сонирхолтой үйл ажиллагааг гаргах үйл ажиллагааг санал болгодог. Англи tweets дээр ирони олох үйл ажиллагаа. Шинэ санал өгсөн систем нь tweet болон hashtag-уудын тодорхой харилцааны тусламжтай байдаг. Энэ нь галзуу холбоотой болон бусад компонентуудын хоорондоо ялгаад тусалдаг. Энэ систем нь хэт хэмжээгээр хэрэглэгдсэн үгний векторуудыг векторын дарааллаар tweets-г орлуулдаг. Бүгдээрээ үгнээс гарч байгаа үгнүүдийн тусламжтайгаар дүрслэгдсэн хариу хэрэглэдэг. БиLSTM болон CNN классификаторын тодорхойлолт хийгдсэн. F1 тоо 0.5939 (23/42) болон 0.3925 (10/28) нь хоёр дахь хоёр дахь, олон хичээлийн тоо бүрт хүрч байсан. Өөр төрлийн загварын итгэл үнэмшил нь алтын тест өгөгдлийг шинжилгээр шалгаж байлаа. Энэ нь олон төрлийн галзуу тодорхойлох үед хэлэлцээг хэрхэн тодорхойлж болох вэ гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mencadangkan proses ekstraksi ciri baru untuk tugas SemEval 3: pengesan ironi dalam tweet Inggeris. Sistem yang diusulkan mengandungi ciri-ciri konatenatif tweet dan hashtag, yang membantu membezakan antara komponen yang berkaitan ironi dan komponen lain. Sistem memasukkan tweet ke dalam urutan vektor dengan vektor perkataan terlatih luas yang digunakan, sebahagian menggunakan penyembahan aksara untuk perkataan yang keluar dari vokbulari. Pengenalan dilakukan dengan pengklasifikasi BiLSTM dan CNN, mencapai skor F1 0.5939 (23/42) dan 0.3925 (10/28) masing-masing untuk kes binari dan multi-kelas, berdasarkan. The reliability of the proposed scheme was verified by analyzing the Gold test data, which demonstrates how hashtags can be taken into account when identifying various types of irony.', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår eit nytt utpakkingsprosess for semiEval- oppgåve 3: Ironioppdaging i engelske tweeter. Systemet foreslått inkluderer ein konkatenativ funksjon på tweet og hashtag, som hjelper å distisera mellom ironiske og andre komponentane. Systemet innebygger tweeter i ein vektorsekvens med breidde brukte ordvektorar, delvis brukar eit teikn innebygd for ord som ikkje er i ordboka. Identifikasjonen vart utført med BiLSTM og CNN-klassifikatorar, og fører til F1-poeng med 0,5939 (23/42) og 0,3925 (10/28) kvar for binær og fleirklasse. Tiltrudd på det foreslåtte oppsettet vart verifisert ved å analysera gulle test data, som viser korleis hashtagane kan vera henta til konto når du identifiserer ulike typar irony.', 'pl': 'W artykule zaproponowano nowatorski proces ekstrakcji cech dla zadania SemEval 3: Wykrywanie ironii w angielskich tweetach. Proponowany system zawiera łączącą funkcjonalizację tweetów i hashtagów, co pomaga rozróżnić elementy związane z ironią od innych. System osadza tweety w sekwencji wektorowej z powszechnie stosowanymi wstępnie trenowanymi wektorami słów, częściowo przy użyciu osadzenia znaków dla słów, które nie są słownikiem. Identyfikację przeprowadzono za pomocą klasyfikatorów BiLSTM i CNN, osiągając wynik F1 0,5939 (23/42) i 0,3925 (10/28) odpowiednio dla przypadku binarnego i wieloklasjowego. Wiarygodność proponowanego schematu zweryfikowano poprzez analizę danych testowych Gold, która pokazuje, jak hashtagi można uwzględnić przy identyfikacji różnych rodzajów ironii.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune un nou proces de extragere a caracteristicilor pentru sarcina SemEval 3: Detectarea ironiei în tweeturile în limba engleză. Sistemul propus încorporează o caracteristică concatenativă a tweet-urilor și hashtagurilor, care ajută la distingerea între componentele legate de ironie și celelalte componente. Sistemul încorporează tweet-uri într-o secvență vectorială cu vectori de cuvinte pre-instruiți pe scară largă, utilizând parțial o încorporare de caractere pentru cuvintele care nu sunt din vocabular. Identificarea a fost efectuată cu clasificatori BiLSTM și CNN, obținând scorul F1 de 0.5939 (23/42) și 0.3925 (10/28) fiecare pentru cazul binar și, respectiv, pentru cazul multi-clasă. Fiabilitatea schemei propuse a fost verificată prin analiza datelor testului Gold, care demonstrează modul în care hashtagurile pot fi luate în considerare atunci când identificăm diferite tipuri de ironie.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jipproponi proċess ġdid ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi għal kompitu SemEval 3: Detezzjoni tal-ironija fit-tweets Ingliż. Is-sistema proposta tinkorpora karatterizzazzjoni konċentrattiva tat-tweet u tal-hashtags, li tgħin fid-distinzjoni bejn il-komponenti relatati mal-ironja u l-komponenti l-oħra. Is-sistema tinkorpora tweets f’sekwenza ta’ vetturi b’vetturi bil-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel li jintużaw b’mod wiesa’, b’mod parzjali billi tintuża karattru li jinkorpora għall-kliem li mhumiex fil-vokabulari. L-identifikazzjoni twettqet bil-klassifikaturi BiLSTM u CNN, li kisbu punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.5939 (23/42) u 0.3925 (10/28) kull wieħed għall-każ binarju u l-każ multiklassiku, rispettivament. L-affidabbiltà tal-iskema proposta ġiet ivverifikata billi ġiet analizzata d-dejta tat-test tad-deheb, li turi kif jistgħu jitqiesu l-hashtags meta jiġu identifikati diversi tipi ta’ ironija.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže nov proces izvlačenja karakteristike za posao semiEval 3: detekcija ironija na engleskim tweetima. Predloženi sistem uključuje konkatentivnu funkciju tweet a i hashtaga, koji pomaže da se razlikuje između ironija i drugih komponenta. Sistem uključuje tweets u sekvenciju vektora sa široko korištenim vektorima predirkivanja riječi, djelomično koristeći karakter koji se uključuje za riječi koje nisu iz rečnika. Identifikacija je provedena sa klasifikatorima BiLSTM i CNN, ostvarila je rezultat F1 od 0,5939 (23/42) i 0,3925 (10/28) svakog za binarni i višeklasni slučaj. Vjerojatnost predložene šeme je proverena analiziranjem podataka zlatnih testova, koji pokazuje kako se hashtagi mogu uzeti u obzir kada identifikuju različite vrste ironija.', 'si': 'Name ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදිහට පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂයක් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂයක් තියෙනවා, ඒකෙන් අයිරෝනි සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සහ අන Name පරීක්ෂණය බිල්ස්ටිම් සහ CNN විශේෂකයෙන් කරලා තියෙනවා, F1 ප්\u200dරමාණය 0.5939 (23/42) සහ 0.3925 (10/28) හැම ප්\u200dරමාණයෙක්ම බායිනාරි සහ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා  ප්\u200dරතිශ්න සැකසුමේ විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ Gold testing data විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ විවිධ වර', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu ka soo jeedaa jardiino ka soo bixinta warqadda SemEval shaqo 3: Garashada ajaanibta ee Ingiriis ku qoran Tweetka. Isticmaalka la soo jeedo waxaa ku qoran bandhig ku saabsan Tweetka iyo hashtagga, kaas oo caawinaya kala soocaanta kuwa la xiriira iyo qaybaha kale. Isticmaalku wuxuu tweeti ku diraa qeyb aad u badan oo lagu isticmaalay qalabka hadalka, qeyb ahaan waxaa loo isticmaalaa xaraf ku qoran erayada aan hadalka ka ka soo baxsan. Aqoonsiga waxaa la sameyn jiray BiLSTM iyo CNN fasalka, waxayna gaadheen koox F1 oo ku qoran 0.5939 (23/42) iyo 0.3925 (10/28) mid kasta oo labaad iyo xaalada kala duduwan. Aaminnimada qorshaha la soo jeeday waxaa lagu xaqiijiyey baaritaanka imtixaanka dahabka, kaas oo caddaynaya sida loo xisaabin karo alaabta marka lagu aqoonsado noocyo kala duduwan oo fikrada ah.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår en ny process för extraktion av funktioner för SemEval uppgift 3: Irony detection i engelska tweets. Det föreslagna systemet innehåller en konatenativ featurisering av tweet och hashtags, vilket hjälper till att skilja mellan ironi-relaterade och andra komponenter. Systemet bäddar in tweets i en vektorsekvens med allmänt använda förkränade ordvektorer, delvis med hjälp av en teckenbäddning för ord som är slut på ordförråd. Identifieringen utfördes med BiLSTM- och CNN-klassificerare och uppnådde F1-poäng på 0,5939 (23/42) respektive 0,3925 (10/28) vardera för det binära respektive flerklassfallet. Det föreslagna systemets tillförlitlighet verifierades genom att analysera Gold testdata, vilket visar hur hashtags kan beaktas vid identifiering av olika typer av ironi.', 'ur': 'This paper proposes a new feature extraction process for SemEval task 3: Irony detection in English tweets. پیغمبر کی سیسٹم نے ٹویٹ اور ہشتاگ کے ایک مطابق ویٹ اور ہٹاگ کی تفصیل میں شامل ہوئی ہے، جو ہیرونی اور دوسری رشتوں کے درمیان تفصیل کرنے کی مدد کرتی ہے. Name پیدا کرنا BiLSTM اور CNN کلاسیر کے ساتھ کیا گیا تھا، جو 0.5939 (23/42) اور 0.3925 (10/28) کی F1 سکوٹ کو پہنچ رہا تھا، ہر دو کلاس کے لئے اور متعدد کلاس کیس کے لئے۔ پیشنهاد کی تصویر کی امانت کی تصدیق کی گلڈ ٹیسٹ ڈیٹے کی تحلیل کے ذریعہ ہے، جو دکھاتا ہے کہ کس طرح ہٹاگ کا حساب لیا جاتا ہے جبکہ مختلف طریقوں کی آزمائش کرتی ہے۔', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval பணிக்கான புதிய குணங்கள் வெளியேற்றும் செயல்பாடு 3: ஆங்கிலத்தில் ஐரோனிய கண்டுபிடிப்பு  பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் ஒரு கூட்டிணைப்பு தொடர்பும் மற்றும் கூறுகளுக்கும் இடையேயுள்ள குறிப்புகளை சேர்க்கிறது, இது விர The system embeds tweets into a vector sequence with widely used pretrained word vectors, partially using a character embedding for the words that are out of vocabulary.  BLSTM மற்றும் CNN வகுப்பாளர் முந்தைய திட்டத்தின் நம்பிக்கையை சரிபார்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது தங்க சோதனையின் தரவை ஆய்வு செய்து, அது எவ்வாறு ஹாஷ்டாக்ஸ் எடுக்க முடியு', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề xuất một tiến trình dịch vụ hoàn hảo cho nhiệm vụ SemEvol 3: Phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter. Hệ thống được đề xuất là một tiết kiệm được liên quan đến tweet và hashtag, giúp phân biệt được các thành phần trớ trêu và các thành phần khác. The system embeds tweets into a vector sequence with widely used premưa word vectors, partly using a character embedding for the words that are out of vốn. Nhận diện được thực hiện với các phân loại BiLSTM và CNN, đạt được điểm F1 của 0.599 (23/2) và 0.3925 (10/28) mỗi lần cho nhị phân và hô hấp đa hạng. Sự đáng tin cậy của kế hoạch được đề xuất đã được kiểm tra bằng cách phân tích dữ liệu Kiểm tra Vàng, để xác minh xem có thể tính toán hashtatages khi xác định các kiểu trớ trêu khác nhau.', 'uz': "Name Tashkilot tizimi Twitter va hashtaglarning bir xil xususiyatlarini qo'shish mumkin. Bu ironi bilan boshqa komponentlarni ajratishga yordam beradi. The system embeds tweets into a vector sequence with widely used pretrained word vectors, partially using a character embedding for the words that are out of vocabulary.  @ info: status Taʼminlovchi qolipning ishonaligi Gold sinov maʼlumotini aniqlash orqali bekor qiladi. Bu ko'plab turli ironi aniqlashda hashtaglarni qanday hisoblash mumkin.", 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže nov proces izvlačenja karakteristike za zadatak semiEval 3: detekcija ironija na engleskim tweetima. Predloženi sustav uključuje konkatentivnu funkciju tweet a i hashtaga, koji pomaže različiti između ironija i ostalih komponenta. Sistem ugrađuje tweets u sekvencu vektora sa široko korištenim vektorima riječi, djelomično koristeći karakter ugrađen za riječi koje nisu iz riječi riječi. Identifikacija je provedena s klasifikatorima BiLSTM i CNN-a, ostvarila je rezultat F1 od 0,5939 (23/42) i 0,3925 (10/28) svakog za binarni i višeklasni slučaj. Vjerojatnost predloženog šema je proverena analiziranjem podataka o zlatnom testu, koji pokazuje kako se etikete mogu uzeti u obzir kada se identificiraju različite vrste ironije.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel stelt een nieuw kenmerkextractieproces voor voor SemEval taak 3: Ironie detection in Engelse tweets. Het voorgestelde systeem bevat een aaneengesloten featurisatie van tweet en hashtags, die helpt onderscheid te maken tussen de ironie-gerelateerde en de andere componenten. Het systeem integreert tweets in een vectorreeks met veel gebruikte vooraf getrainde woordvectoren, gedeeltelijk met behulp van een teken embedding voor de woorden die buiten woordenschat zijn. Identificatie werd uitgevoerd met BiLSTM en CNN classificatoren, waarbij F1 score werd bereikt van 0.5939 (23/42) en 0.3925 (10/28) elk voor de binaire en multi-class case, respectievelijk. De betrouwbaarheid van het voorgestelde schema werd geverifieerd door de Gold testdata te analyseren, die aantoont hoe hashtags in aanmerking kunnen worden genomen bij het identificeren van verschillende soorten ironie.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия предлага нов процес на извличане на функции за задача 3: откриване на ирония в английски туитове. Предложената система включва конкатентативно представяне на туит и хаштагове, което помага да се разграничи между свързаните с ирония и другите компоненти. Системата вгражда туитове във векторна последователност с широко използвани предварително тренирани вектори на думи, частично използвайки вграждане на символи за думите, които са извън речника. Идентификацията е извършена с класификатори BiLSTM и CNN, като се постига резултат F1 от 0,5939 (23/42) и 0,3925 (10/28) съответно за двоичен и мултикласен случай. Надеждността на предложената схема беше проверена чрез анализ на данните от теста, което демонстрира как хаштаговете могат да бъдат взети под внимание при идентифицирането на различни видове ирония.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår en ny feature extraction proces til SemEval opgave 3: Irony detection i engelske tweets. Det foreslåede system indeholder en sammenhængende featurisering af tweet og hashtags, som hjælper med at skelne mellem ironi-relaterede og de andre komponenter. Systemet integrerer tweets i en vektorsekvens med almindeligt anvendte forudtrænede ordvektorer, delvist ved hjælp af en tegn integrering for de ord, der er ude af ordforråd. Identifikationen blev udført med BiLSTM og CNN klassificerere, der opnåede F1 score på 0,5939 (23/42) og 0,3925 (10/28) hver for det binære og multi-class case, henholdsvis. Pålideligheden af den foreslåede ordning blev verificeret ved at analysere Gold testdata, som viser, hvordan hashtags kan tages i betragtning, når man identificerer forskellige typer ironi.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک فرایند خارج کردن ویژه نویسی برای کار نیمه\u200cای ۳ پیشنهاد می\u200cکند: شناسایی آیرونی در tweets انگلیسی. سیستم پیشنهاد یک ویت و hashtag مشترک شامل است که کمک می\u200cکند جدایی بین بخش\u200cهای مسخره\u200cای و دیگر بخش\u200cهای مسخره\u200cای باشد. سیستم توئیت\u200cها را در یک دستور ویکتور با ویکتورهای کلمه\u200cای که به وسیع استفاده می\u200cشود وارد می\u200cکند، قسمتی از یک شخصیت که برای کلمات\u200cهای خارج از کلمات استفاده می\u200cشود استفاده می\u200cکند. شناسایی با کلی\u200cکننده\u200cهای BiLSTM و CNN انجام می\u200cشود، با رسیدن امتیاز F1 از 0.5939 (23/42) و 0.3925 (10/28) هر یک برای پرونده دو کلاس و چندین کلاس است. قابلیت برنامه پیشنهاد با تحلیل داده\u200cهای آزمایش طلا تحقیق شد که نشان می\u200cدهد که چگونه هشتگال\u200cها می\u200cتوانند در زمان شناسایی از نوع مختلف ریشه\u200cها به حساب بگیرند.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit schlägt ein neuartiges Feature Extraction Verfahren für SemEval Task 3 vor: Irony Detection in English Tweets. Das vorgeschlagene System enthält eine verkettete Funktion von Tweet und Hashtags, die hilft, zwischen den ironischen Komponenten und den anderen Komponenten zu unterscheiden. Das System bettet Tweets in eine Vektorsequenz mit weit verbreiteten vortrainierten Wortvektoren ein, teilweise unter Verwendung einer Zeicheneinbettung für Wörter, die außerhalb des Wortschatzes liegen. Die Identifizierung wurde mit BiLSTM- und CNN-Klassifikatoren durchgeführt, wobei jeweils ein F1-Score von 0.5939 (23/42) und 0.3925 (10/28) für den binären und den multi-class Fall erreicht wurde. Die Zuverlässigkeit des vorgeschlagenen Schemas wurde anhand der Gold-Testdaten verifiziert, die zeigen, wie Hashtags bei der Identifizierung verschiedener Arten von Ironie berücksichtigt werden können.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan proses ekstraksi fitur baru untuk tugas SemEval 3: deteksi ironi dalam tweet Inggris. Sistem yang diusulkan mengandung fitur konatenatif dari tweet dan hashtag, yang membantu membedakan antara komponen yang terkait ironi dan komponen lainnya. Sistem memasukkan tweet ke dalam urutan vektor dengan vektor kata yang sering digunakan, sebagian menggunakan karakter memasukkan untuk kata-kata yang keluar dari vokabular. Identifikasi dilakukan dengan klasifikasi BiLSTM dan CNN, mencapai skor F1 0,5939 (23/42) dan 0,3925 (10/28) masing-masing untuk kasus binari dan multi-kelas, respectively. Kepercayaan skema yang diusulkan diuji dengan menganalisis data tes emas, yang menunjukkan bagaimana hashtag dapat dipertimbangkan ketika mengidentifikasi berbagai jenis ironi.', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel 'n nuwe funksie uittrekking proses vir SemEval taak 3: Ironie optrekking in Engelske tweets. Die voorgestelde stelsel inkorpreer 'n konsatenatiewe eienskap van tweet en hashtags, wat help om tussen die ironieverwante en die ander komponente te te skiedenis. Die stelsel inbêer tweets in 'n vektor volgorde met vaste gebruikte vormige woord vektore, gedeeltelik gebruik 'n karakter inbêer vir die woorde wat uit woordeboek is. Identifikasie is uitgevoer met BiLSTM en CNN klassifiseerders, met F1 telling van 0.5939 (23/42) en 0.3925 (10/28) elkeen vir die binêre en die multiklas saak, respektief. Die vertroulikheid van die voorgestelde skema is bevestig deur die Goud toets data te analiseer, wat wys hoe hashtags kan in rekening neem word wanneer verskillende tipes ironie identifiseer word.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linapendekeza mchakato wa utekelezaji wa riwaya kwa ajili ya kazi ya SemEval 3: Ugunduzi wa ujinga katika twiti za Kiingereza. The proposed system incorporates a concatenative featurization of tweet and hashtags, which helps distinguishing between the irony-related and the other components.  Mfumo huo unaweka twiti kwenye mfululizo wa sekta ya vector yenye matumizi makubwa yanayotumiwa na vector za neno, sehemu ya kutumia mhusika ulioambatana kwa maneno yasiyo na lugha. Utambulisho ulifanyika na wataalamu wa BiLSTM na CNN, wakifikia vipindi vya F1 vya 0.5939 (23/42) na 0.3925 (10/28) kila mmoja kwa ajili ya kipindi hicho na kesi ya darasa nyingi. Utuaminifu wa mpango huo ulithibitishwa kwa uchambuzi wa taarifa za jaribio la dhahabu, ambazo zinaonyesha namna alama za habari zinavyoweza kuchukuliwa wakati wa kutambua aina mbalimbali za kejeli.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon një proces të ri të nxjerrjes së karakteristikave për detyrën SemEval 3: zbulimi i ironisë në tweetet angleze. Sistemi i propozuar përfshin një shfaqje konkrete të tweetit dhe hashtagesh, që ndihmon të dallohet midis komponenteve të tjera të lidhura me ironinë. Sistemi përfshin tweetet në një sekuencë vektorësh me vektorë fjalësh të përdorur gjerësisht, duke përdorur pjesërisht një karakter të përfshirë për fjalët që janë jashtë fjalorin. Identification was performed with BiLSTM and CNN classifiers, achieving F1 score of 0.5939 (23/42) and 0.3925 (10/28) each for the binary and the multi-class case, respectively.  Besueshmëria e skemës së propozuar u verifikua duke analizuar të dhënat e testit të artë, e cila demonstron se si mund të merren parasysh hashtaget kur identifikohen llojet e ndryshme të ironisë.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval täblisasy 3: Iňlisçe tweets içinde kironiň tapylygy saýlaýar. Mazmunlar sistemada tweet we hashtag bilen tanyş etmäge kömek edip, geňinç we başga zatlar arasynda tapawutlandyrýar. Sistem sözlerin dışındaki sözler için bir karakter içeren vektör dizisine ekleýär. BiLSTM we CNN sahypalary bilen tanyşdyryldy, F1 sany 0.5939 (23/42) we 0.3925 (10/28) her iki sany we multi-sınıf sany üçin ýeterdi. Taýýarlanan taslaýanyň ynamlylyklygyny Altyn synagy maglumaty barlamak üçin bardyr. Bu nusga çeşitli türleri ýüregi tanyşýanda hashtalaryň nähili netijesi netijesini görkezilip biljek bolandygyny görkezýär.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የረኀብ አቀማመጥ ፕሮጀክት ለSemEval ስራ 3: በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች የኢዮኖን ግለጽ ያሳያል፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ስርዓት የTwitter እና ሐሽታግሮች መግለጫ እና በሁለተኛው ክፍሎች መካከል ለመለየት ይረዳል፡፡ ሲስተም የቃላት ቃላትን ለመጠቀም የሚጠቀሙትን ትዊተሮችን በጠቅላላ የሚጠቀሙትን የቃላትን አካባቢ ለመጠቀም የሚጠቀሙትን አካላት በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ የቢልSTM እና CNN ክፍላፊዎች የF1 score 0.5939 (23/42) እና 0.3925 (10/28) ለብናዊው እና ለብዙው ክፍል እንዲደርሱ ተፈጸመ። The reliability of the proposed scheme was verified by analyzing the Gold test data, which demonstrates how hashtags can be taken into account when identifying various types of irony.', 'ko': '본고는 SemEval 임무 3: 영어 트윗의 반어 검측에 대해 새로운 특징 추출 방법을 제시했다.이 시스템은 트위터와 태그를 연결해 역설과 관련된 내용과 다른 내용을 구분하는 데 도움이 된다.이 시스템은 추문을 벡터 서열에 삽입하는데, 광범위하게 사용되는 예비 훈련 단어의 벡터를 포함하고, 어휘표 이외의 단어 부분에 문자를 삽입한다.BilSTM과 CNN 분류기를 사용해 식별한 결과 이원과 여러 가지 사례의 F1은 각각 0.5939(23/42)와 0.3925(10/28)로 나타났다.Gold 테스트 데이터에 대한 분석을 통해 이 방안의 신뢰성을 검증했고 각종 유형의 반어를 식별할 때 라벨을 어떻게 고려하는지 증명했다.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը առաջարկում է նոր հատկանիշների վերացման գործընթաց "ՍեմԷվալ" 3-ի համար\' անգլերենի թվիթերում հեռավորության հայտնաբերման համար: Առաջարկված համակարգը ներառում է թվիթ և հաշտագ հատուկ հատկություն, որը օգնում է տարբերակել հեգնությամբ կապված և այլ բաղադրիչների միջև: Համակարգը ներառում է թվիթերը վեկտորի հաջորդականության մեջ, որտեղ լայնորեն օգտագործված են նախկին ուսուցված բառերի վեկտորներ, մասամբ օգտագործելով բառերից դուրս գտնվող բառերի բնորոշ: ԲիԼՍԹՄ և CNN դասակարգչի միջոցով իրականացվեց ինքնությունը, որի արդյունքում յուրաքանչյուրը ստացավ F1 գնահատականը՝ 0.59 39 (23.42) և 0.3925 (10.28) երկարագույն և բազմադասական դեպքերում: Պատրաստված ծրագրի վստահությունը ստուգել էր ոսկու թեստերի տվյալների վերլուծությամբ, ինչը ցույց է տալիս, թե ինչպես հաշտակները կարող են հաշվի առնել տարբեր տեսակի հեղինակության հայտնաբերման ժամանակ:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt SemEval task 3 üçün yeni fəaliyyət ekstraksiyası prosesini təbliğ edir: İngilizə tweetlərdə ironi keşf edir. Tövrat və hashtag sistemi, ironi ilə başqa komponentlərin arasında ayırmağa kömək edir. Sistem sözlərdən uzaqlaşan sözlər üçün bir karakter istifadə edir. BLSTM və CNN klasifikatçıları ilə təşkil edildi, hər biri ikili və çoxlu sınıf vasitəsi üçün F1 nöqtəsini 0,5939 (23/42) və 0,3925 (10/28) ola bilər. Təsdiq edilmiş taslağın güvenilişi altın sınama verilənlərini analiz etməklə təsdiq edildi. Bu, müxtəlif ironi tanıdığında hashtaqların necə hesablama biləcəyini göstərir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল কাজ ৩: ইংরেজি টুইটে আইরোনি সনাক্তি প্রস্তাব করেছে। প্রস্তাবিত ব্যবস্থা টুইট এবং হ্যাশট্যাগের একটি সংশ্লিষ্ট বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্য, যা বিদ্রূপ এবং অন্যান্য উপ সিস্টেম একটি ভেক্টরের সেকেন্ডে টুইট করে দিয়েছে যার সাথে ব্যাপকভাবে ব্যবহৃত শব্দ ভেক্টর, অংশে শব্দভাণ্ডারের বাইরে যে শব্দ ব্যবহার বাইলস্টিম এবং সিএনএন বিশ্লেষকদের সাথে পরিচয়পত্র প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে, যার ফলে প্রত্যেকটি বাইনারি এবং বহুশ্রেণীর কেসের জন্য F1 স্কোর পাওয়া যায়। প্রস্তাবিত পরীক্ষার তথ্য বিশ্লেষণের মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাবিত পরিকল্পনার বিশ্বাস নিশ্চিত করা হয়েছে, যা প্রদর্শন করেছে কিভাবে বিভিন্ন ধরনের', 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje nový proces extrakce funkcí pro SemEval úlohu 3: detekce ironie v anglických tweetech. Navržený systém obsahuje řetězcové vlastnosti tweetů a hashtagů, které pomáhají rozlišovat mezi ironií souvisejícími a ostatními složkami. Systém vloží tweety do vektorové sekvence s široce používanými předtrénovanými slovními vektory, částečně používá vložení znaků pro slova, která jsou mimo slovní zásobu. Identifikace byla provedena pomocí klasifikátorů BiLSTM a CNN, přičemž bylo dosaženo F1 skóre 0,5939 (23/42) a 0,3925 (10/28) pro binární a multitřídní případ. Spolehlivost navrženého schématu byla ověřena analýzou testovacích dat Gold, která ukazuje, jak lze brát v úvahu hashtagy při identifikaci různých typů ironie.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö pakub välja uudse funktsiooni ekstraheerimise protsessi SemEval ülesande 3: iroonia tuvastamine inglise säutsides. Kavandatud süsteem sisaldab säutsu ja hashtagi konkatenatiivset funktsioneerimist, mis aitab eristada irooniaga seotud komponente ja teisi komponente. Süsteem põimib säutsud vektorsjadasse laialdaselt kasutatavate eeltreenitud sõnavaraktoritega, kasutades osaliselt sõnavara väljaspool olevate sõnade jaoks põimitud märki. Identifitseerimine viidi läbi BiLSTM ja CNN klassifikaatoritega, saavutades F1 skoori 0,5939 (23/42) ja 0,3925 (10/28) vastavalt binaarse ja mitmeklassilise juhtumi puhul. Kavandatud skeemi usaldusväärsust kontrolliti Gold testi andmete analüüsimisega, mis näitab, kuidas hashtage saab arvestada erinevate irooniatüüpide tuvastamisel.', 'ca': "This paper proposes a novel feature extraction process for SemEval task 3: Irony detection in English tweets.  El sistema proposat incorpora una característica concatenativa de tweets i hashtags, que ajuda a distingir entre els components relacionats amb l'ironia i els altres. El sistema incorpora tweets en una seqüència de vectors amb vectors de paraules generalment utilitzats, en part utilitzant un caràcter incorporat per les paraules que estan for a del vocabulari. La identificació es va fer amb els classificadors BiLSTM i CNN, aconseguint una puntuació F1 de 0,5939 (23/42) i 0,3925 (10/28) cada una per al cas binari i multiclasse, respectivament. La fiabilitat del esquema proposat va ser verificada analitzant les dades del test d'or, que demostra com es poden tenir en compte els hashtags al identificar diversos tipus d'ironia.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže novi proces izvlačenja karakteristike za posao semiEval 3: detekcija ironija na engleskim tweetima. Predloženi sistem uključuje konkatentivnu funkciju tweet a i hashtaga, koji pomaže da se razlikuje između ironija i ostalih komponenta. Sistem ugrađuje tweets u sekvencu vektora sa široko korištenim vektorima riječi, djelomično koristeći karakter ugrađenog za riječi koje nisu iz rečnika. Identifikacija je provedena sa klasifikatorima BiLSTM i CNN, postižeći F1 rezultat od 0,5939 (23/42) i 0,3925 (10/28) svakog za dvojni i višeklasni slučaj. Vjerojatnost predložene šeme je proverena analiziranjem podataka zlatnih testova, koji pokazuje kako se hashtagi mogu uzeti u obzir kada se identificiraju različite vrste ironija.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan uutta ominaisuuden uuttamisprosessia SemEval-tehtävään 3: Irony detection in English tweets. Ehdotettu järjestelmä sisältää tweetin ja hashtagin yhdistävän featuroinnin, joka auttaa erottamaan ironiaan liittyvät komponentit muista komponenteista. Järjestelmä upottaa tweetit vektorisekvenssiin laajalti käytettyjen esikoulutettujen sanavektorien avulla, osittain käyttämällä merkkiupotusta sanoille, jotka ovat sanaston ulkopuolella. Tunnistaminen suoritettiin BiLSTM- ja CNN-luokituksilla, jolloin F1-pisteet olivat 0,5939 (23/42) ja 0,3925 (10/28) binääritapauksessa ja moniluokan tapauksessa 0,3925 (10/28). Ehdotetun järjestelmän luotettavuus varmistettiin analysoimalla Gold-testiaineistoa, joka osoittaa, miten hashtagit voidaan ottaa huomioon erityyppisten ironiatyyppien tunnistamisessa.', 'ha': "Bu takardar da ke buƙata wani jarrabar zartar da shiryarwa na yanzu wa aikin SemEal 3: Ciron na gane cikin Ingiriya. @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis An samar da shaidar BiLStM da CNN-fasalarari, da za'a sãmu F1 score 0.5939 (23/42) da 0.3925 (10/28) kõwane wa'yan birnin da ke cikin multi-daraja. An gaskata wa shirin ayuka da aka buƙata, a gaskata shi da ya yi analyza data na jarrabar Gold, wanda ya nuna yadda zã a iya ɗauki alama idan an gane wasu irin kino.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציעה תהליך חיטוף תכונות חדש למשימה סמי-אוול 3: גילוי אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים. The proposed system incorporates a concatenative featurization of tweet and hashtags, which helps distinguishing between the irony-related and the other components.  המערכת מכניסה טוויטים לרצף ווקטורים עם ווקטורים מילים משתמשים מראש, משתמשים חלקית באמצעות אופי מכניסה למילים שנוצאות מהמילים. זיהוי הופך עם מסמכי BILSTM ו-CNN, השיג נקודת F1 של 0.5939 (23/42) ו-0.3925 (10/28) לכל אחד מהם למקרה בינארי והמולטלקס, בהתאם. האמינות של המערכת המוצעת נאבדה על ידי ניתוח הנתונים של מבחן הזהב, שמוכיח כיצד אפשר לקחת בחשבון את האשטגים בזיהוי סוגים שונים של אירוניה.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predlagan nov postopek ekstrakcije funkcij za nalogo SemEval 3: Zaznavanje ironije v angleških tweetih. Predlagani sistem vključuje konkatenativno karaturizacijo tweetov in hashtagov, ki pomaga razlikovati med ironijo povezanimi in drugimi komponentami. Sistem vključuje tweete v vektorsko zaporedje s široko uporabljenimi predtreniranimi besednimi vektorji, delno z vgradnjo znakov za besede, ki niso v besedišču. Identifikacija je bila opravljena s klasifikatorji BiLSTM in CNN, pri čemer je bila za binarni primer dosežena ocena F1 0,5939 (23/42) oziroma 0,3925 (10/28). Zanesljivost predlagane sheme smo preverili z analizo Gold testnih podatkov, ki kažejo, kako je mogoče hashtage upoštevati pri identifikaciji različnih vrst ironije.', 'jv': 'This paper offes a new character extration program for semebal task 3: irny detection in englisian Sistem supomongke sing ngendalikno sistem sing sampeyan operasi tentang karo tiket lan hash-tags, sing nyulung oleh nggawe kamu tanggal sing apik dhéwé karo perusahaan sing apik karo perusahaan sing wis ana. System Only one Kapan dipurangke nggawe akeh perusahaan akeh pisan neng dadi nyong nggunakake Golembak', 'bo': 'SemEval task 3:Irony detection in English tweets. This paper proposes a novel feature extraction process for SemEval task 3: Irony detection in English tweets. གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་དང་ཤོག་བྱང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཅིག་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། The system embeds tweets in a vector sequence with widely used pretrained word vectors, partially using a character embedding for the words that are out of the vocabulary. དམིགས་འཛུགས་ནི་BiLSTM དང་CNN་ཡིག་སྡུད་པ་ཚོ་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཡིན། བྱ་ཚིག་གི་ཨང་ཀི0.5939 (23/42) དང་། 0.3925 (10/28) རེ་རེར་སོ་སོའི་ནད་ཀྱིས་མང་ཆེ་བ་ཡོད། འདིས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་འཆར་གྱི་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་ལ་རྟོགས་རུང་ངེས་བདེན་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ལས་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་བཞིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'WLV at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'ar': 'WLV في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: تشريح التغريدات بحثًا عن السخرية', 'es': 'WLV en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Diseccionar tuits en busca de ironía', 'fr': "WLV au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Disséquer des tweets à la recherche de l'ironie", 'pt': 'WLV no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Dissecando Tweets em Busca de Ironia', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のWLVタスク3 ：アイロニーを探すツイートの解析', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर WLV: विडंबना की खोज में Tweets विच्छेदन', 'zh': 'WLV在SemEval-2018务3:剖析推文以求刺', 'ru': 'WLV на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Рассечение твитов в поисках иронии', 'ga': 'WLV ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Tweets a Dhíscaradh ar Lorg na híoróine', 'hu': 'WLV a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Tweetek feldolgozása az irónia keresésében', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Διάταξη τουίτετ σε αναζήτηση ειρωνείας', 'it': "WLV a SemEval-2018 Task 3: dissezionare tweet alla ricerca dell'ironia", 'kk': 'WLV жарым- 2018 тапсырмасы 3: Ирония іздеу үшін Tweets бөлу', 'ka': 'WLV semiEval-2018 დავალება 3: გადაწყვეტილი Tweets Irony- ის ძიებაში', 'ms': 'WLV di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Menghapuskan Tweet dalam Carian Ironi', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3-ല്\u200d വില്\u200dവി', 'mt': 'WLV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'lt': 'WLV 2018 m. puslapyje 3 užduotis: išskirstyti Tweets ieškant ironijos', 'mk': 'WLV на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Отстранување на твитови во потрага по иронија', 'mn': 'WLV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'ro': 'WLV la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Disectarea tweeturilor în căutarea ironiei', 'no': 'WLV på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Skiljer Tweets i søk på Irony', 'sr': 'WLV na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 3: raskidanje Tweets u potrazi za Ironijom', 'pl': 'WLV na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Rozpracowanie tweetów w poszukiwaniu ironii', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'WLV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Distribution Tweets in search of Ironium', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 3- ல் WLV: Iron தேடுதலில் இருந்து Tweets பிரிக்கப்படுகிறது', 'sv': 'WLV på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Dissektera tweets på jakt efter ironi', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 3 میں WLV: آئرونی تلاش میں ٹیوٹوں کو ٹیٹ ٹیٹ ٹیٹ ٹیٹ ڈیٹ کر رہا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'WV tại SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 3: Phân chia Tweet trong Tìm kiếm mỉa mai', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Разрязване на туитове в търсене на ирония', 'hr': 'WLV na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 3: raskidanje Tweets u potrazi za Ironijom', 'nl': 'WLV op SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Tweets ontleden op zoek naar ironie', 'da': 'WLV på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Dissektering af tweets på jagt efter ironi', 'de': 'WLV auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Aufteilen von Tweets auf der Suche nach Ironie', 'id': 'WLV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'sw': 'WLV kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Kugawanya Twita katika Kutafuta Ujerumani', 'ko': '2018년SemEval에서의 WLV 미션3: 트위터 분석 풍자 찾기', 'fa': 'WLV در پایین اول-۲۰۱۸ تابع ۳: جدا کردن Tweets in Search of Irony', 'tr': 'WLV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'af': 'WLV by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 3: Verskeur Tweets in Soek van Irony', 'sq': 'WLV në SemEval-2018 Task 3: Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'am': 'ስራ 3:Dissecting Tweets in search of Ironium', 'hy': 'ՈւԼՎ 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ"-ի 3-րդ հանձնարարությունը. երկար թվիթեր բաժանելը', 'az': 'WLV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'bn': 'WLV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'bs': 'WLV na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: raskidanje Tweets u potrazi za Ironijom', 'ca': 'WLV a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'et': 'WLV SemEval-2018 ülesanne 3: Tweetide lõikamine iroonia otsimisel', 'cs': 'WLV na SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Disekce tweetů při hledání ironie', 'fi': 'WLV SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 3: Tweettien levittäminen ironian etsinnässä', 'jv': 'WLV at semi-inval-2008 task 3: Dissection', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'WLV na SemEval-2018 naloga 3: Disekacija tweets v iskanju ironije', 'bo': 'WLV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Dissecting Tweets in Search of Irony', 'he': 'WLV ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: להפריד טוויטים בחיפוש אחר אירוניה'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the systems submitted to SemEval 2018 Task 3 Irony detection in English tweets for both subtasks A and B. The first system leveraging a combination of sentiment, distributional semantic, and text surface features is ranked third among 44 teams according to the official leaderboard of the subtask A. The second system with slightly different representation of the features ranked ninth in subtask B. We present a method that entails decomposing tweets into separate parts. Searching for contrast within the constituents of a tweet is an integral part of our system. We embrace an extensive definition of contrast which leads to a vast coverage in detecting ironic content.', 'es': 'Este documento describe los sistemas presentados a la Tarea 3 de SemEval 2018 «Detección de ironía en tweets en inglés» para las subtareas A y B. El primer sistema que aprovecha una combinación de características de sentimiento, semántica distributiva y superficie de texto ocupa el tercer lugar entre 44 equipos según la tabla de clasificación oficial del subtarea A. El segundo sistema con una representación ligeramente diferente de las características ocupó el noveno lugar en la subtarea B. Presentamos un método que implica descomponer los tuits en partes separadas. Buscar el contraste entre los componentes de un tuit es una parte integral de nuestro sistema. Adoptamos una amplia definición de contraste que conduce a una amplia cobertura en la detección de contenido irónico.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة الأنظمة المقدمة إلى SemEval 2018 Task 3 "الكشف عن المفارقة في التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية" لكل من المهمتين الفرعيتين A و B. تم تصنيف النظام الأول الذي يستفيد من مزيج من المشاعر والدلالات التوزيعية وميزات سطح النص في المرتبة الثالثة بين 44 فريقًا وفقًا لـ لوحة الصدارة الرسمية للمهمة الفرعية أ. النظام الثاني مع تمثيل مختلف قليلاً للميزات المرتبة التاسعة في المهمة الفرعية ب. نقدم طريقة تتضمن تفكيك التغريدات إلى أجزاء منفصلة. يعد البحث عن التباين داخل مكونات تغريدة جزءًا لا يتجزأ من نظامنا. نحن نتبنى تعريفًا واسعًا للتباين يؤدي إلى تغطية واسعة في الكشف عن المحتوى المثير للسخرية.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve os sistemas submetidos à Tarefa 3 do SemEval 2018 "Detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês" para ambas as subtarefas A e B. O primeiro sistema que utiliza uma combinação de recursos de sentimento, semântica de distribuição e superfície de texto é o terceiro classificado entre 44 equipes de acordo com o ranking oficial da subtarefa A. O segundo sistema com representação ligeiramente diferente dos recursos ficou em nono lugar na subtarefa B. Apresentamos um método que envolve a decomposição de tweets em partes separadas. A busca por contraste nos constituintes de um tweet é parte integrante do nosso sistema. Adotamos uma definição extensa de contraste que leva a uma vasta cobertura na detecção de conteúdo irônico.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit les systèmes soumis à la tâche 3 de SemEval 2018 «\xa0Détection de l'ironie dans les tweets anglais\xa0» pour les sous-tâches A et B. Le premier système utilisant une combinaison de caractéristiques de sentiment, de sémantique distributionnelle et de surface de texte est classé troisième parmi 44 équipes selon le classement officiel du sous-tâche A. Le deuxième système avec une représentation légèrement différente des entités s'est classé neuvième dans la sous-tâche B. Nous présentons une méthode qui consiste à décomposer les tweets en parties distinctes. La recherche de contraste entre les constituants d'un tweet fait partie intégrante de notre système. Nous adoptons une définition étendue du contraste qui mène à une vaste couverture dans la détection du contenu ironique.", 'ja': '本稿では、サブタスクAとBの両方について、SemEval 2018タスク3「英語のツイートにおけるイロニー検出」に提出されたシステムについて説明する。センチメント、分布セマンティック、およびテキスト面の特徴の組み合わせを活用した最初のシステムは、サブタスクAの公式リーダーボードによると、44チーム中3位である。サブタスクBで9位にランクされた特徴の表現が若干異なる2番目のシステムは、ツイートを別々の部分に分解する方法を提示する。ツイートの構成要素内のコントラストを検索することは、当社のシステムの不可欠な部分です。私たちはコントラストの広範な定義を採用しており、皮肉なコンテンツの検出における広範なカバレッジにつながります。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2018 टास्क 3 "अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाने" दोनों उप-कार्यों के लिए प्रस्तुत प्रणालियों का वर्णन करता है। भावना, वितरणात्मक शब्दार्थ और पाठ सतह सुविधाओं के संयोजन का लाभ उठाने वाली पहली प्रणाली को सबटास्क ए के आधिकारिक लीडरबोर्ड के अनुसार 44 टीमों के बीच तीसरे स्थान पर रखा गया है। सुविधाओं के थोड़ा अलग प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ दूसरी प्रणाली सबटास्क बी में नौवें स्थान पर है। हम एक ऐसी विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो ट्वीट्स को अलग-अलग हिस्सों में विघटित करने पर जोर देती है। एक ट्वीट के घटकों के भीतर इसके विपरीत के लिए खोज हमारे सिस्टम का एक अभिन्न अंग है। हम इसके विपरीत की एक व्यापक परिभाषा को गले लगाते हैं जो विडंबनापूर्ण सामग्री का पता लगाने में एक विशाल कवरेज की ओर जाता है।', 'zh': '本文引SemEval 2018务3"英语推讽刺性检测"之统,用于子职AB。 据子职A官方排行榜,首用情,布语义与文本表合者系44团队中第三。 二统者,略有不同也,子职 B 中第九。 吾等建一法,须将推文分解为独者。 于推文成分中搜索对比度乃吾系统不可或缺之一体也。 吾受对比度之广义,以检刺之广覆盖范围。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описываются системы, представленные SemEval 2018 Task 3 «Обнаружение иронии в английских твитах» для обеих подзадач A и B. Первая система, использующая комбинацию сентиментальных, дистрибутивных семантических и текстовых поверхностных признаков, занимает третье место среди 44 команд согласно официальной таблице лидеров подзадачи A. Вторая система с немного отличающимся представлением признаков занимает девятое место в подзадаче B. Мы представляем метод, который влечет за собой декомпозицию твитов на отдельные части. Поиск контраста внутри составляющих твита является неотъемлемой частью нашей системы. Мы принимаем широкое определение контраста, что приводит к обширному охвату в обнаружении иронического содержания.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar na córais a cuireadh isteach chuig Tasc 3 SemEval 2018 “Brath íoróin i dtvuíteanna Béarla” d’fhothascanna A agus B. Tá an chéad chóras a ghiaráil teaglaim de dhearcadh, de shéimeantach dáileacháin, agus de ghnéithe dromchla an téacs sa tríú háit i measc 44 fhoireann de réir na faisnéise. clár ceannais oifigiúil an fhothasc A. Tá an dara córas le léiriú beagán difriúil ar na gnéithe rangaithe sa naoú háit i bhfothasc B. Cuirimid modh i láthair a bhaineann le tweets a dhianscaoileadh ina gcodanna ar leith. Is cuid lárnach dár gcóras é codarsnacht a chuardach laistigh de chomhábhair tweet. Glacaimid le sainmhíniú fairsing ar chodarsnacht as a dtagann clúdach ollmhór maidir le hábhar íoróin a bhrath.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τα συστήματα που υποβλήθηκαν στο Task 3 "Ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα Αγγλικά tweets" και για τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες Α και Β. Το πρώτο σύστημα που αξιοποιεί έναν συνδυασμό συναισθημάτων, σημασιολογικής κατανομής, Το δεύτερο σύστημα με ελαφρώς διαφορετική αναπαράσταση των χαρακτηριστικών που κατατάσσονται στην ένατη θέση στην υποταγή Β. Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο που συνεπάγεται τη διάσπαση των tweets σε ξεχωριστά μέρη. Η αναζήτηση αντίθεσης μέσα στα συστατικά ενός tweet είναι αναπόσπαστο μέρος του συστήματός μας. Αγκαλιαζόμαστε έναν εκτεταμένο ορισμό της αντίθεσης που οδηγεί σε μια τεράστια κάλυψη στην ανίχνευση ειρωνικού περιεχομένου.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის შესახებ სისტემები, რომელიც SemEval 2018 დავამუშავებული სამუშაო დავამუშავებული სამუშაო სამუშაო "ინგლისური ტივიტებში იპრონია" ორივე სამუშაო A და B. პირველი სისტემა და ტექსტის სამუშაო ფუნქციები 44 ჯგუფი შორის სამუშაო ხარისხია A სამუშაო ხარისხის დამატებით. მეორე სისტემა ცოტა განსხვავებული ფუნქციების გამოსახულება B სამუშაო ხარისხში. ჩვენ გამოსახულებთ ჩვენი სისტემის ინტერგენტალური ნაწილი არის კონტრასტის შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ მივიღებთ განსაზღვრებული კონტრასტის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც უფრო დიდი კონტრასტის შესახებ იპონიკური შესახებ.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive i sistemi presentati a SemEval 2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets' per entrambe le sottoattività A e B. Il primo sistema che sfrutta una combinazione di sentiment, semantica distributiva, Il secondo sistema con una rappresentazione leggermente diversa delle caratteristiche si è classificato nono nella sottomissione B. Presentiamo un metodo che comporta la decomposizione dei tweet in parti separate. La ricerca del contrasto all'interno dei componenti di un tweet è parte integrante del nostro sistema. Abbracciamo un'ampia definizione di contrasto che porta ad una vasta copertura nel rilevare contenuti ironici.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 Task 3 "Irony detection in English tweets" című feladathoz benyújtott rendszereket mind az A, mind a B alcsoport esetében. Az A altűrűség hivatalos ranglistája szerint 44 csapat közül a harmadik helyen áll. A B altűrűségben a kilencedik helyen álló második rendszer. Bemutatunk egy olyan módszert, amely magában foglalja a tweetek külön részekre bontását. A kontraszt keresése a tweet alkotóelemein belül rendszerünk szerves része. A kontraszt kiterjedt definícióját foglaljuk magunknak, ami hatalmas lefedettséget eredményez az ironikus tartalom felismerésében.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamos sistemos, pateiktos SemEval 2018 m. 3 uždaviniui „Ironijos nustatymas anglų kalba tweetuose“ abiejų A ir B papunkčių atžvilgiu. - ir teksto paviršiaus charakteristikos yra trečia iš 44 komandų pagal oficialią A paklausos lentelę. Antroji sistema su šiek tiek skirtingu charakteristikų, priskiriamų 9 paklausos B paklausai, atskyrimu. Mes pateikiame metodą, pagal kurį tweetai suskirstomi į atskiras dalis. Kontrasto paieška tweeto rinkėjose yra neatsiejama mūsų sistemos dalis. Priimame platų kontrasto apibrėžimą, dėl kurio nustatomas ironinis turinys.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ги опишува системите поднесени на SemEval 2018 задача 3 „Детектирање на иронија на англиски твитови“ за двете подзадачи А и Б. Првиот систем кој користи комбинација на чувства, дистрибуционална семантика,  and text surface features is ranked third among 44 teams according to the official leaderboard of the subtask A. The second system with slightly different representation of the features ranked ninth in subtask B. We present a method that entails decomposing tweets into separate parts.  Барањето контраст во изборниците на Твитер е интегрален дел од нашиот систем. Ние ја прифаќаме широката дефиниција на контраст која води до огромно покривање на идентификацијата на ироничната содржина.', 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar ke SemEval 2018 Tugas 3 'Pengesanan ironi dalam tweet Inggeris' untuk kedua-dua subtaskin A dan B. Sistem pertama yang menggunakan kombinasi perasaan, semantik distribusi, - dan ciri-ciri permukaan teks ditandai ke-3 diantara 44 pasukan menurut papan pemimpin rasmi bagi subtask A. Sistem kedua dengan perwakilan yang sedikit berbeza ciri-ciri ditandai ke-9 dalam subtask B. Kami perkenalkan kaedah yang mengandungi penghapusan tweet ke bahagian terpisah. Searching for contrast within the constituents of a tweet is an integral part of our system.  Kami menerima definisi yang luas terhadap perbezaan yang membawa kepada penyamaran yang luas dalam mengesan kandungan ironi.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың SemEval 3 тапсырмасына "Ағылшын tweets тізімінде ирониялық анықтау" жүйелерін түсіндіреді. Бірінші жүйе сезімдік, дистрибуттық семантикалық тізімінің біріктіру үшін, Мәтін поверхностының мүмкіндіктері "A" асты сұранысының әкімшілігіне сәйкес, 44 топтардың үшінші ретінде орнатылады. Екінші жүйесі "B" асты сұранысында 9- ші ретіндегі мүмкіндіктерді бірнеше түрлі көрсетеді. Біз tweets б Твиттеу құрылғыларында контрасты іздеу - жүйеміздің бөлігі. Ироникалық мазмұнын анықтау үшін көптеген контрастық анықтамасын қабылдаймыз.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь SemEval 2018 Task 3-д "Англи tweets дээр тайлбарлаж буй газрын тодорхойлолт" гэсэн системийг A болон B дотор хоёуланг тайлбарладаг. Мөн Текст гадаргуу нь А-ын албан ёсны удирдагч буудалдаа 44 баг хоёр дахь хэсэг байдаг. 2 дахь систем нь B-ын албан ёсны дүрсийг бага зэрэг өөр дүрсийг харуулдаг. Бидний системийн бүтцийн хэсэг. Бид маш их эсрэг тодорхойлолтыг хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлдэг. Энэ нь гайхамшигтай тодорхойлолтуудыг олж мэдэхэд маш том мэдээллийг хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлдэг.', 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഐറോണി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക' എന്ന സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യത്തെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഒര സബ്ട്ടൌസിന്റെ ഔദ്യോഗിക നേതാവ് ബിന്റെ രണ്ടാം സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒമ്പതാം വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ കുറച്ച് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രതിനിധികളുണ്ട്. ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഭ ഒരു ടൂട്ടിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ്പുണ്ടെന്ന് തിരയുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു സം We embrace an extensive definition of contrast which leads to a vast coverage in detecting ironic content.", 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistemi sottomessi lil SemEval 2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets' għa ż-żewġ sottomistoqsijiet A u B. L-ewwel sistema li tagħti spinta lil kombinazzjoni ta' sensazzjoni, semantika distributtiva, Il-karatteristiċi tas-superfiċje tat-test huma kklassifikati fit-tielet fost 44 tim skont it-tabella ta’ tmexxija uffiċjali tas-sottomistoqsija A. It-tieni sistema b’rappreżentazzjoni kemmxejn differenti tal-karatteristiċi kklassifikati fid-disa’ sottomistoqsija B. A ħna nippreżentaw metodu li jinvolvi d-dekompożizzjoni tat-tweets f’partijiet separati. It-tfittxija għal kuntrast fi ħdan il-kostitwenti ta’ tweet hija parti integrali mis-sistema tagħna. Aħna naħdmu definizzjoni estensiva ta' kuntrast li twassal għal kopertura vast a fl-iskoperta ta' kontenut ironiku.", 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver system a som er sendt til semiEval 2018 oppgåve 3 «Irony Detection in English tweets» for både underspørjingar A og B. Den første systemet leverer ein kombinasjon av følelser, distribusjonssemantisk, Dette andre systemet med litt forskjellig representasjon av funksjonane rankert ni i underspørjing B. Vi presenterer ein metode som inneheld å dekomprimera tweeter i aparte deler. Søk etter kontrast i konstitusjonane av ei tweet er ein integral del av systemet vår. Vi bruker eit utvida definisjon av kontrast som fører til ein stor dekking i oppdaging av ironisk innhald.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje systemy zgłoszone do SemEval 2018 Task 3 "Wykrywanie ironii w angielskich tweetach" dla podzadań A i B. Pierwszy system wykorzystujący kombinację sentymentu, semantyki dystrybucyjnej, Wśród 44 zespołów znajduje się trzecie miejsce wśród oficjalnej tablicy liderów podzadania A. Drugi system o nieco odmiennej reprezentacji funkcji klasyfikowanych dziewiątych w podzadaniu B. Przedstawiamy metodę polegającą na rozkładaniu tweetów na oddzielne części. Poszukiwanie kontrastu wewnątrz składników tweeta jest integralną częścią naszego systemu. Przyjmujemy szeroką definicję kontrastu, która prowadzi do szerokiego zakresu w wykrywaniu ironicznych treści.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemele prezentate la SemEval 2018 Task 3 "Detectarea ironiei în tweeturile în limba engleză" pentru ambele subactivități A și B. Primul sistem utilizând o combinație de sentiment, semantică distribuțională, Caracteristicile suprafeței textului și caracteristicilor de suprafață se clasează pe locul trei în rândul celor 44 de echipe în funcție de clasamentul oficial al subactivității A. Al doilea sistem cu reprezentare ușor diferită a caracteristicilor ocupate pe locul nouă în subactivitatea B. Vă prezentăm o metodă care implică descompunerea tweeturilor în părți separate. Căutarea contrastului în componentele unui tweet este parte integrantă a sistemului nostru. Îmbrățișăm o definiție extinsă a contrastului care duce la o acoperire vastă în detectarea conținutului ironic.', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu qoraa nidaamka loo soo dhiibay SemEval 2018 Shaqada 3 'Garashada Ironika ku qoran Tweetka Ingiriiska' oo u qoran labada waajibaadka A iyo B. Tirada ugu horraysay ayaa soo diraya qalabka xisaabta, qaybsiga Xiriikhda taariikhda qoraalka ee kooxda waa saddexaad oo ka mid ah 44 kooxda sida uu qabto madaxda rasmiga ah ee subtashka A. Kooxda labaad oo ay leeyihiin noocyo kala duduwan oo ku qoran tasbiilka sagaalaad ee sub-task B. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ku saabsan inay tweetka u qaybsadaan qaybo kala duduwan. Qoraadinta is-hoos ah oo ka mid ah nidaamka. Waxaannu ku daboolnaa qoraalka kala duwan oo ballaadhan, kaas oo ku saabsan dabool aad u badan, si aad u ogaato waxyaabaha ku qoran.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver de system som lämnats in till SemEval 2018 Task 3 "Irony detection in English tweets" för båda delaktiviteterna A och B. Det första systemet som utnyttjar en kombination av sentiment, distributionssig semantik, Det andra systemet med något annorlunda representation av funktionerna rankas nionde i underaktivitet B. Vi presenterar en metod som innebär att tweets delas upp i separata delar. Att söka efter kontrast inom komponenterna i en tweet är en integrerad del av vårt system. Vi anammar en omfattande definition av kontrast vilket leder till en stor täckning när det gäller att upptäcka ironiskt innehåll.', 'sr': "Ovaj papir opisuje sisteme podignute na zadatak 3. na semiEval 2018 'Ironičko otkrivanje na engleskim tweets' za oba podstava A i B. Prvi sistem koji utiče na kombinaciju sentiment a, distribucijskog semantika, Drugi sistem sa malo različitim predstavljanjem karakteristika reda devetog u podpitanju B. Predstavljamo metodu koja uključuje raskidanje tweeta u odvojene delove. Traženje kontrasta unutar sastavnika tweet a je integralni deo našeg sistema. Prihvatili smo ogromnu definiciju kontrasta koja vodi do ogromnog pokrivanja u otkrivanju ironičkog sadržaja.", 'ur': 'اس کاغذ نے سیمئولی 2018 ٹاکس 3 کی تحویل کی سیستمات کی توضیح دی ہے "انگلیسی ٹویٹ میں آئرونی اچانک" دونوں A اور B کے لئے. پہلی سیستمات نے حساس، تقسیم سیمانٹیک کی ترکیب کی ہے، اور ٹیکسٹ سطح فرضیات 44 ٹیموں میں تیسرے درجے ہیں A کے رسمی لیڈربورڈ کے مطابق. دوسری سیسٹم کے مطابق تھوڑی مختلف فرضیات کے مطابق نو درجے کے مطابق B میں ہے. ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو ٹیٹوں کو مختلف قسموں میں تقسیم کرتا ہے. ایک ٹویٹ کے معاملات کے اندر کنٹراس کا تلاش کرنا ہمارے سیسٹم کا ایک حصہ ہے. ہم ایک گھیرے مقابلہ کی تعریف کو پکڑتے ہیں جو ایک گھیرے حیران کی موتوں کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے بہت بڑی محفوظت تک پہنچاتا ہے۔', 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වෙල් 2018 කාර්ය 3 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් වල අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න' පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා. සහ පාළ පුළුවන් අවස්ථාවක් තුන්වෙනි කණ්ඩායම් අතර 44 කණ්ඩායම් අතර අධාරික පුළුවන් A වලින් තුන්වෙනි පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන්  ට්විට් එක්ක සැකසුම් ඇතුලේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිකාරය හොයාගන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතියේ සංකේතක කොටසක්. අපි විශාල විශේෂ විශේෂයක් අල්ලගන්නවා, ඒකෙන් විශාල විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වෙනුවෙන් විශා", 'ta': "இந்த தாள் செம்வால் 2018 க்கு வழங்கப்பட்ட அமைப்புகளை விவரிக்கும் செயல் 3 'ஐரோனி கண்டுபிடிப்பு' ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து துணை பணிகளுக்கும் A மற்றும் B  and text surface features is ranked third among 44 teams according to the official leaderboard of the subtask A. The second system with slightly different representation of the features ranked ninth in subtask B. We present a method that entails decomposing tweets into separate parts.  ஒரு டுவிட்டின் தலைவர்களுக்குள் மாறுபாட்டை தேடுகிறது நமது கணினியின் ஒரு முழு பகுதியாகும். நாம் ஒரு விரிவான விளக்கமான வரையறையை ஏற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம். அது மிகப்பெரிய அலங்காரத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பொர", 'uz': 'Bu sahifa SemEval 2018 ishlatilgan tizimlarning 3 "Ingliz Twitterda Iron aniqlash" vazifasi A va B haqida yaratadi. Birinchi tizim birinchi hisob, tarqatish semantik bir kombinatsiya boshlanadi. Va matn surface xossalari Aning shaxsiy vazifa sarlavhasi sifatida 44 guruhdagi uchinchi guruhdagi uchinchi darajaga ega. ikkinchi tizim B tub vazifasida saga xizmatdagi xususiyatlarni kichkina ajratish mumkin. Biz Twittlarni alohida o\'zgartirish mumkin. Twitterning taʼminlovchilarida qidirish tizimimizning bir tarqatish qismi. Biz murakkablikning kengaytirish aniqlarini qo\'llamiz, bu kekkinchi tarkibini aniqlashga katta kodlash mumkin.', 'vi': "B ài viết này mô tả hệ thống được gửi đến nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác phần mềm 3'Phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter) cho cả phần A và B. Hệ thống đầu tiên sử dụng cùng một kiểu tình cảm, và các tính năng bề mặt chữ được xếp hạng ba trong 44 theo bảng hiệu chính của mặt A. Hệ thống thứ hai có sự phân phối khác nhau các tính năng được xếp hạng chín theo thứ B. Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp dẫn đến việc tweet phân hủy thành các phần khác nhau. Tìm kiếm sự tương phản trong các cử tri của tweet là một phần của hệ thống chúng ta. Chúng ta nắm lấy một định nghĩa nét tương phản bao quát dẫn đến việc khám phá nội dung trớ trêu.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системите, представени на задача 3 "Откриване на ирония в английски туитове" за двете подзадачи А и Б. Първата система използва комбинация от сентиментална, дистрибуционна семантична, Характеристиките на текстовата повърхност се класират на трето място сред 44 отбора според официалната класация на подзадача А. Втората система с малко по-различно представяне на функциите се класира на деветото място в подзадача Б. Представяме метод, който включва разграждане на туитове на отделни части. Търсенето на контраст в съставките на туит е неразделна част от нашата система. Ние възприемаме обширно определение на контраста, което води до огромно покритие в откриването на иронично съдържание.', 'hr': "Ovaj novinar opisuje sustave podignute na zadatak 3. na semiEval 2018 'Ironijskom otkrivanju na engleskim tweets' za podstavke A i B. Prvi sustav koji utječe na kombinaciju osjećaja, distribucijske semantike, Drugi sustav s malo različitim predstavljanjem karakteristika reda devetog u podpitanju B. Predstavljamo metodu koja uključuje raskidanje tweeta u odvojene dijelove. Traženje kontrasta unutar sastavnika tweet a je integralni dio našeg sustava. Prihvatili smo ogromnu definiciju kontrasta koja vodi do ogromnog pokrivanja u otkrivanju ironičkog sadržaja.", 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver de systemer, der er indsendt til SemEval 2018 Opgave 3 'Irony detection in English tweets' for både underopgaver A og B. Det første system, der udnytter en kombination af sentiment, distributionsmæssig semantik, Det andet system med lidt anderledes repræsentation af funktionerne rangeret niende i underopgave B. Vi præsenterer en metode, der indebærer nedbrydning af tweets i separate dele. Søgning efter kontrast inden for bestanddelene af en tweet er en integreret del af vores system. Vi omfatter en omfattende definition af kontrast, som fører til en stor dækning i detektering af ironisk indhold.", 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft de systemen die zijn ingediend bij SemEval 2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets' voor beide subtaken A en B. Het eerste systeem dat gebruikmaakt van een combinatie van sentiment, distributionele semantische, Het tweede systeem met een iets andere weergave van de negende functies in subtaak B. We presenteren een methode waarbij tweets in afzonderlijke delen worden opgesplitst. Het zoeken naar contrast binnen de onderdelen van een tweet is een integraal onderdeel van ons systeem. We omarmen een uitgebreide definitie van contrast wat leidt tot een uitgebreide dekking in het detecteren van ironische inhoud.", 'de': "Diese Arbeit beschreibt die Systeme, die an SemEval 2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets' für beide Teilaufgaben A und B eingereicht wurden. Das zweite System mit leicht abweichender Darstellung der Merkmale, die neunt in Teilaufgabe B platziert wurden, ist laut offizieller Rangliste der Teilaufgabe A. Wir stellen eine Methode vor, bei der Tweets in separate Teile zerlegt werden. Die Suche nach Kontrasten innerhalb der Bestandteile eines Tweets ist ein integraler Bestandteil unseres Systems. Wir nutzen eine umfassende Definition von Kontrast, die zu einer umfassenden Abdeckung bei der Erkennung ironischer Inhalte führt.", 'ko': "본고는 SemEval 2018 퀘스트 3'영어 트윗에서의 역설적 탐지'에 제출된 하위 퀘스트 A와 B의 시스템을 설명한다. 첫 번째 시스템은 감정, 분포 의미,하위 퀘스트 A의 공식 순위에 따르면 텍스트 표면 특징은 44개 팀 중 3위에 올랐다. 두 번째 시스템은 하위 퀘스트 B에서 9위에 랭크된 특징에 대한 표시가 약간 다르다. 우리는 추문을 단독 부분으로 분해하는 방법을 제시했다.추문의 구성 부분에서 대비를 찾는 것은 우리 시스템의 없어서는 안 될 부분이다.우리는 대비도를 광범위하게 정의하여 풍자 내용을 검출할 때 광범위한 범위를 제공했다.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم\u200cهایی را که به تابع ۲۰۱۸ در نیمه ۲۰۱۸ ارائه داده می\u200cشود، توضیح می\u200cدهد که برای هر دو زیر آینده\u200cهای A و B ارائه می\u200cشود. اولین سیستم\u200cهایی که به ترکیب احساسات، سیمانتیک\u200cهای تقسیم می\u200cدهد، و ویژه\u200cهای سطح متن سومین از ۴۴ تیم در طبق ورود رهبری رسمی از پاسپرس A است. سیستم دوم با نمایش اندکی متفاوت از ویژه\u200cهای نوم در پاسپرس B درجه می\u200cگیرد. ما یک روش را نشان می\u200cدهیم که توئیت\u200cها را به بخش\u200cهای متفاوت جدا می\u200cکند. جستجوی تفاوت در مجموعه\u200cهای توئیت بخشی از سیستم ما است. ما تعریف بسیار وسیع تفاوت را گرفتیم که به یک پوشش بسیار زیادی در کشف محتوای مسخره است.', 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang dikirim ke SemEval 2018 Task 3 'Deteksi ironi dalam tweet Inggris' untuk kedua subtasks A dan B. Sistem pertama menggunakan kombinasi sentimen, distribusi semantis, Dan karakteristik permukaan teks tertinggi diantara 44 tim menurut papan pemimpin resmi dari subtask A. Sistem kedua dengan sedikit berbeda perwakilan karakteristik tertinggi sembilan dalam subtask B. Kami mempersembahkan metode yang mengandung decomposing tweet ke bagian terpisah. Mencari kontras dalam komponen tweet adalah bagian integral dari sistem kita. Kami menerima definisi yang luas dari kontras yang menyebabkan penyamaran yang luas dalam mendeteksi isi ironis.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval 2018 Göreve 3 'Iňlisçe tweets' diýip süýtgedilen sistemalary hem A we B süýtgeligine görkezilýär. Ilkinji sistemi duýgular we paýlaşma semantik bilen birleştirilýär, we metin suratynyň özellikleri 44 topar arasynda resmi A süýtgesiniň liderligine görä 3-nji düzüldir. Ikinji sistemi B süýtgesinde 9-nji düzüldir. Biz tweetleri ayrı parçalara taýýarlamak üçin bir yöntemi görkeýäris. Tweet komponentlerinde kontrast gözlemek sistemimiziň integral bölegidir. Biz sürekli kontrastyň definisyonyny kabul edip, iýjin maksadyny tanamak üçin örän köp daşyrdyr.", 'sw': "This paper describes the systems submitted to SemEval 2018 Task 3 'Irony detection in English tweets' for both subtasks A and B. The first system leveraging a combination of sentiment, distributional semantic,  and text surface features is ranked third among 44 teams according to the official leaderboard of the subtask A. The second system with slightly different representation of the features ranked ninth in subtask B. We present a method that entails decomposing tweets into separate parts.  Kutafuta tofauti ndani ya wabunge wa twita ni sehemu ya mfumo wetu. Tunakaribia maelezo makubwa ya tofauti ambayo yanapelekea habari kubwa katika kutambua maudhui ya kejeli.", 'sq': "Ky dokument përshkruan sistemet e paraqitura në SemEval 2018 Task 3 'Detection of Irony in English tweets' për të dy subtasket A dhe B. Sistemi i parë që nxjerr një kombinim të ndjenjave, semantike shpërndarëse,  and text surface features is ranked third among 44 teams according to the official leaderboard of the subtask A. The second system with slightly different representation of the features ranked ninth in subtask B. We present a method that entails decomposing tweets into separate parts.  Searching for contrast within the constituents of a tweet is an integral part of our system.  We embrace an extensive definition of contrast which leads to a vast coverage in detecting ironic content.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die stelsels wat na SemEval 2018 Taak 3 'Ironie beskrywing in Engelse tweets' voor beide subtaske A en B. Die eerste stelsel wat 'n kombinasie van sentiment, verspreidingse semantiek verwyder, Die tweede stelsel met 'n klein verskillende voorstelling van die funksies rangeer negende in subvra B. Ons voorstel 'n metode wat bevat om tweete in aparte dele te ontkoppel. Soek vir kontras binne die konstitusies van 'n tweet is 'n integraal deel van ons stelsel. Ons aangryp 'n uitbreidige definisie van kontras wat lei na 'n groot aandekking in beskrywing van ironiese inhoud.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է համակարգերը, որոնք ներկայացվել են 2018 թվականի "Սեմեվալ 2018" 3-ի "Իրոնիայի հայտնաբերումը անգլերեն թվիթերում" երկու ենթաթերթերի A և B-ի համար: Առաջին համակարգը, որը օգտագործում է զգացմունքների, դիստր Եվ տեքստի մակերևույթի առանձնահատկությունները դասակարգում են երրորդ 44 թիմերի միջև, ըստ A-ի ենթահարցի պաշտոնական առաջնորդների տախտակի: Երկրորդ համակարգը, որի առանձնահատկությունները մի փոքր տարբեր ներկայացում են B-ի ենթահարցում: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մեթոդ, որը ներ Թվիթի ընտրողների մեջ հակադրություն փնտրելը մեր համակարգի անկախ մասն է: We embrace an extensive definition of contrast which leads to a vast coverage in detecting ironic content.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለኢንጂልኛ ትዊተሮች “የኢሮኒ ግለፅ በይንግሊዘኛ ትዊተሮች” ለስርዓቶች አ እና B የሚሰጡትን ስርዓቶች ይግለጻል። የመጀመሪያው ስርዓት፣ የተለያዩ የስሜት ሰሜናዊ ስርዓት የሚሰጡትን በ አዳራቢው ፕሮግራም ላይ ባለሥልጣዊ ፕሬዚደንት አና የጽሑፍ የፊደል ምርጫዎች ከ44 ጭፍሮች መካከል ሦስተኛ ደረጃ ይደረጋሉ። ሁለተኛይቱ ስርዓት B ውስጥ ዘጠኝቱን የተለየ ምርጫዎች በጥቂት የተለየ ነው። ትዊተሮችን በተለየ ክፍሎች እንዲያቆሙ እናስባለን፡፡ በትዊተር አካባቢዎች ውስጥ ተቃውሞ የሚፈልግ የስርዓታችን ክፍል ነው፡፡ ተቃውሞ የሚነካውን ትርጉም መፍታትን እናስቀናለን፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt hər ikisinin A və B aparıcılığı üçün SemEval 2018 Göndərdiyi Sistemləri təsbit edir. İlk sistem duyguları, dağıtıcı semantik kombinatsiyasını tətbiq edir, Mətn səbəbi özellikləri A subtask vasitəsilə birlikdə 44 dəstədən üçüncü dəstədir. İkinci sistem B subtask vasitəsilə doqquz dəstədir. Biz twetləri ayrı dəstədir. Tövidlərin müəyyənləşdirilmələrində tərəzisi axtarmaq sistemimizin integral bir parçasıdır. İronik məzmunlarını keşfetmək üçün böyük bir pərdə yaratdığımız müxtəlif tərzlərin müəyyən edilməsini qəbul edirik.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ব্যাখ্যা করেছে যে সেমভাল ২০১৮ টাকায় প্রদান করা হয়েছে ইংরেজী টুইটে আইরোনি সনাক্ত করা ব্যবস্থাগুলোর সিস্টেমগুলোর ব্যাখ্যা করা হয়েছে। সাবটাসের আনুষ্ঠানিক নেতা বোর্ড অনুসারে ৪৪ টি দলের মধ্যে টেক্সটের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের সামান্য বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিত্ব রয়েছে। আমরা একটি পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছ টুইটের প্রতিনিধিদের মধ্যে বিরোধীতা অনুসন্ধান করা হচ্ছে আমাদের সিস্টেমের একটি একত্র অংশ। আমরা বিস্তৃত বিরোধীতার ব্যাপারে এক বিস্তারিত সংখ্যা গ্রহণ করেছি যা বিশাল কাভারেজের কাছে বিশাল পরিহাসের', 'cs': "Tento článek popisuje systémy předložené do SemEvalu 2018 Task 3 'Detekce ironie v anglických tweetech' pro podúkoly A i B. První systém využívající kombinaci sentimentu, distribuční sémantiky, Podle oficiálního žebříčku podúkolu A je druhý systém s mírně odlišným zastoupením funkcí umístěných na devátém místě v podúkolu B. Představujeme metodu, která spočívá v rozložení tweetů do samostatných částí. Hledání kontrastu uvnitř složek tweetu je nedílnou součástí našeho systému. Přijímáme rozsáhlou definici kontrastu, která vede k rozsáhlému pokrytí při detekci ironického obsahu.", 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje sisteme podignute na zadatak 3. iz semiEvala 2018 'Ironijsko otkrivanje na engleskim tweets' za podatke A i B. Prvi sistem koji utiče na kombinaciju osjećaja, distribucijskog semantika, Drugi sistem sa malo različitim predstavljanjem karakteristika reda devetog u podpitanju B. Predstavljamo metodu koja uključuje raskidanje tweeta u odvojene dijelove. Traženje kontrasta unutar sastavnika tweet a je integralni dio našeg sistema. Prihvaćamo ogromnu definiciju kontrasta koja vodi do ogromnog pokrivanja u otkrivanju ironičkog sadržaja.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse süsteeme, mis on esitatud SemEval 2018 ülesandele 3 "Irony detection in English tweets" nii alamülesannete A kui ka B jaoks. Esimene süsteem, mis kasutab kombinatsiooni sentimentaalsest, jaotussemantilisest, Alaülesande A ametliku edetabeli kohaselt on 44 meeskonna seas kolmandal kohal. Alaülesande B alaülesandes üheksandal kohal teine süsteem omaduste veidi erineva esitusega. Esitleme meetodit, mis hõlmab säutsude eraldi osadeks lagundamist. Kontrasti otsimine säutsu koostisosades on meie süsteemi lahutamatu osa. Me kasutame kontrastsuse ulatuslikku määratlust, mis viib iroonilise sisu tuvastamise ulatusliku ulatuseni.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2018 -tehtävään 3 "Irony detection in English tweets" lähetettyjä järjestelmiä sekä alatehtävissä A että B. Ensimmäinen järjestelmä hyödyntää tunteiden, jakelusemantiikan ja semantiikan yhdistelmää. Alatehtävän A virallisen tulostaulukon mukaan 44 tiimin joukosta kolmas. Alatehtävän B yhdeksänneksi sijoittunut järjestelmä sisältää hieman erilaisen esitystavan ominaisuuksista. Esitämme menetelmän, joka sisältää twiittien hajottamisen erillisiksi osiksi. Kontrastin etsiminen tweetin osatekijöistä on olennainen osa järjestelmäämme. Meillä on laaja kontrastin määritelmä, joka johtaa laajaan kattavuuteen ironisen sisällön havaitsemisessa.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu els sistemes submetits a SemEval 2018 tasca 3 'Detecció d'ironia en tweets anglesos' per ambdues subtaskes A i B. El primer sistema que aprofita una combinació de sentiment, semàntic distribucional, I les característiques de la superfície de text es classifiquen en tercer lloc entre 44 equips segons la taula oficial de líder de la subtanya A. El segon sistema amb una representació ligerament diferent de les característiques es classifiquen en nou lloc a la subtanya B. Presentam un mètode que implica descomposició de tweets en parts diferents. Searching for contrast within the constituents of a tweet is an integral part of our system.  We embrace an extensive definition of contrast which leads to a vast coverage in detecting ironic content.", 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé iki rambaran sistem sing nyimpen kanggo seminval 2013 task 3 \'ironé kebutuhan ning tuytes Inggris\' kanggo mulai nggambar A lan B. Sistem tualkar dhéwé nggawe sistem tualke semantar, ndhek tanggal, politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive" text Awakdhéwé éntuk akeh nggambar aturan contrast sing dadi nggawe kapan-kapan kanggo ngilanggar aturan irno.', 'sk': "Ta prispevek opisuje sisteme, predložene SemEval 2018 nalogi 3 'Odkrivanje ironije v angleških tweetih' za podopravila A in B. Prvi sistem, ki uporablja kombinacijo sentimentalnega, distribucijskega semantičnega, Po uradni lestvici podnaloge A je drugi sistem z nekoliko drugačno predstavitvijo funkcij devetega v podnalogi B. Predstavljamo metodo, ki vključuje razgradnjo tweetov v ločene dele. Iskanje kontrasta znotraj sestavnih delov tweeta je sestavni del našega sistema. Sprejemamo obsežno definicijo kontrasta, ki vodi do obsežne pokritosti pri odkrivanju ironične vsebine.", 'ha': "Wannan takardar na bayyana tsarin da aka saka zuwa SemEV 2018 Tafiyar 3 'Iron Finamince cikin Ingiriya' wa saurar taskõki A da B. Yaren farkon na samar da komkoma na hisani, diffdi na semantic, • kuma masu daidaita matsayin rufe na ranka na uku daga 44 jama'a kamar shirin mai rasmi na shaidar sub-aikin A. Tsarin na biyu wanda ya yi wani abu kaɗan da mai sãɓãni wa masu haɗi na saga cikin sub-aikin B. Mu zo da wani hanyoyi wanda yana kasancẽwa ta gaura Twitter cikin rabo. Yi neman motsi da ke cikin masu cikin shirin Twitter guda ne wani rabo guda na'uranmu. Munã karɓi wani fassara mai ƙunci na tsakanin da ke samu wani rufi mai girma a gane maɓallin jerin.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་མ་ལག་གི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་2018་(SemEval) ལ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། " ཡི་གེའི་གདོང་ཁུང་ཆོས་དེ་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་པ་ལས་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྟོན་དང་། Tweet་ཡི་གནས་ཚད་ལ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ནུས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཆིག་ཤས་ཤིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གསལ་བ་ཞིག་གི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་ཡོད། འདིས་ironik་ནང་དོན་རྟོགས་ཤིག་ཏུ་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད།', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכות שנשלחו לסימוול 2018 משימה 3 "גילוי אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים" לשני התשומות A ו-B. המערכת הראשונה שמשתמשת בשילוב של רגשות, סמנטיקה פיצועית,  and text surface features is ranked third among 44 teams according to the official leaderboard of the subtask A. The second system with slightly different representation of the features ranked ninth in subtask B. We present a method that entails decomposing tweets into separate parts.  חיפוש אחר התנגדות בתוך הבחירים של טוויט הוא חלק אינטגרנטלי של המערכת שלנו. אנו מקבלים הגדרה רחבה של ההתנגדות שמובילה לכיסוי ענק בלגלות תוכן אירוני.'}
{'en': 'Irony Detector at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Irony Detection in English Tweets using Word Graph', 'ar': 'Irony Detector في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: الكشف عن المفارقة في التغريدات الإنجليزية باستخدام Word Graph', 'pt': 'Irony Detector na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês usando Word Graph', 'es': 'Detector de ironía en Semeval-2018 Tarea 3: Detección de ironía en tuits en inglés mediante Word Graph', 'fr': "Irony Detector à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Détection de l'ironie dans les tweets en anglais à l'aide de Word", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のアイロニー検出器タスク3 ：ワードグラフを使用した英語のツイートでのアイロニー検出', 'ru': 'Детектор иронии в SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Обнаружение иронии в твитах на английском языке с использованием Word Graph', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018职3刺探测器:用Word Graph英语推文中刺检', 'hi': 'सेमेवल-2018 टास्क 3 पर विडंबना डिटेक्टर: वर्ड ग्राफ़ का उपयोग करके अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाना', 'ga': 'Brathadóir íoróin ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Brath íoróin i dTvuíteanna Béarla ag úsáid Word Graph', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Irónia detektor a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Irónia detektor angol tweetekben Word Graph segítségével', 'kk': 'Ағылшын tweets тізімінің шегі- 2018 тапсырмасы 3: Ағылшын tweets тізімінде тізім анықтау', 'el': 'Ανιχνευτής ειρωνείας στο Εργασία 3: Ανιχνευτής ειρωνείας στα Αγγλικά με τη χρήση γραφήματος λέξεων', 'it': "Rilevatore dell'ironia a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Rilevamento dell'ironia nei tweet inglesi utilizzando Word Graph", 'ms': 'Pengesan Ironi di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Pengesan Irony dalam Tweets Inggeris menggunakan Graf Perkataan', 'lt': 'Ironijos detektorius SemEval-2018 3 užduotis: Ironijos detektorius anglų dvietais naudojant žodžių grafiką', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Англи Tweets дээр Төмөр Detector Word Graph ашигладаг Төмөр Detector', 'mk': 'Ирониски детектор на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Ирониски детектор на англиски твитови користејќи Word Graph', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് ഗ്രാഫ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഐറോനി ഡിറ്ററ്റര്\u200d', 'no': 'Irony Detector at semiEval-2018 Oppgåve 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets using Word Graph', 'ro': 'Detector de ironie la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Detectarea ironiei în tweeturile engleze folosind Word Graph', 'mt': 'Detettur tal-Ironja fis-SemEval-2018 Kompitu 3: Detezzjoni tal-Ironja fit-Tweets Ingliżi bl-użu tal-Word Graph', 'sr': 'Ironijski detektor na semiEval-2018 Task 3: Ironijska detekcija na engleskim Tweets koristeći Word Graph', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Gariirka ajaanigga ee SemEval-2018 Shaqo 3: Gariirka ajaaniga ee Ingiriis ku qoran Tweets using eray graf', 'pl': 'Wykrywacz ironii w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Wykrywanie ironii w angielskich tweetach za pomocą wykresu Word Graph', 'sv': 'Irony Detector på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Irony Detector i engelska Tweets med Word Graph', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 3: Iron Detection in English Tweets using Word Graph', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: انگلیسی ٹویٹوں میں آئرونی ڈاکٹر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện mỉa mai tại Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8: Phát hiện mỉa mai bằng cách dùng Từ Đồ sộ', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Откриване на ирония в английски туитове с помощта на графика на думи', 'da': 'Irony Detector på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Irony Detection på engelske tweets ved hjælp af Word Graph', 'hr': 'Ironijski detektor na pola Eval-2018 zadatak 3: Ironijska otkrića na engleskim Tweets koristeći Word Graph', 'nl': 'Ironie Detector bij SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Ironie Detector in Engelse Tweets met behulp van Word Graph', 'de': 'Ironie Detector bei SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ironie Detector in englischen Tweets mit Word Graph', 'id': 'Detektor Ironi di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Deteksi Ironi di Tweets Inggris menggunakan Word Graph', 'fa': 'بازرس آهنگ در پایین اول-۲۰۰۸ کار ۳: شناسایی آهنگ در Tweets انگلیسی با استفاده از Word Graph', 'ko': 'SemEval-18의 반풍 검출 퀘스트 3: 텍스트 그래프를 사용하여 영어 트윗의 반풍을 검출', 'sw': 'Mtambuzi wa Uholanzi katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Uchunguzi wa kisheria kwa lugha ya Kiingereza kwa kutumia Tafsiri ya Neno', 'tr': 'SemEval-2018 Görev 3: Iňlisçe Taýýarlar', 'af': 'Irony Detector at SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets using Word Graph', 'sq': 'Detektori i ironisë në SemEval-2018 Çështja 3: Detektimi i ironisë në Tweets angleze duke përdorur grafikun e fjalëve', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 3: Ironic Detection in English Tweets using Word Graph', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: İngilizce Tweets içində Irony Detector Word Graph vasitəsilə', 'hy': 'Իրոնիայի հայտնաբերողը 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի 3. խնդիր. Իրոնիայի հայտնաբերողը անգլերեն թվիթերում՝ օգտագործելով Word Graf', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩: ইংরেজী টুইটারে আইরোনি ডিটেক্টর ব্যবহার করে শব্দ গ্রাফ ব্যবহার করে', 'cs': 'Detektor ironie na SemEval-2018 Úloha 3: Detekce ironie v anglických tweetech pomocí Word Graph', 'bs': 'Ironijski detektor na pola Evala-2018 Task 3: Ironijska detekcija na engleskim Tweets koristeći Word Graph', 'ca': "Detector d'ironia a SemEval-2018 tasca 3: Detecció d'ironia en Tweets anglesos utilitzant Word Graph", 'fi': 'Irony Detector SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets using Word Graph', 'et': 'Irony Detector SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 3: Irony Detector inglise tweets kasutades Word Graphi', 'jv': 'Karakter Samsul at semiinval-2008 task 3: irny detection in French Two used Word Graph', 'sk': 'Detektor ironije na SemEval-2018 Naloga 3: Zaznavanje ironije v angleških tweetih z uporabo Word Grapha', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'he': 'גלאי אירוניה ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 3: גליית אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים באמצעות גרף מילים', 'bo': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in English Tweets using Word Graph'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the Irony detection system that participates in SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Irony detection in English tweets. The system participated in the subtasks A and B. This paper discusses the results of our system in the development, evaluation and post evaluation. Each class in the dataset is represented as directed unweighted graphs. Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector. This vector is used as features by machine learning algorithm. The model is evaluated on a hold on strategy. The organizers randomly split 80 % (3,833 instances) training set (provided to the participant in training their system) and testing set 20%(958 instances). The test set is reserved to evaluate the performance of participants systems. During the evaluation, our system ranked 23 in the Coda Lab result of the subtask A (binary class problem). The binary class system achieves accuracy 0.6135, precision 0.5091, recall 0.7170 and F measure 0.5955. The subtask B (multi-class problem) system is ranked 22 in Coda Lab results. The multiclass model achieves the accuracy 0.4158, precision 0.4055, recall 0.3526 and f measure 0.3101.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système de détection Irony qui participe aux tweets anglais de SEMEVAL-2018 Task 3\xa0: Irony detection. Le système a participé aux sous-tâches A et B. Cet article traite des résultats de notre système dans le développement, l'évaluation et la post-évaluation. Chaque classe de l'ensemble de données est représentée sous forme de graphiques non pondérés orientés. Ensuite, la comparaison est effectuée avec chaque graphe de classe qui aboutit à un vecteur. Ce vecteur est utilisé comme fonctionnalités par l'algorithme d'apprentissage automatique. Le modèle est évalué sur la base d'une stratégie d'attente. Les organisateurs ont réparti aléatoirement 80\xa0% (3 833 instances) de l'ensemble de formation (fourni au participant à la formation de son système) et le jeu de test 20\xa0% (958 instances). L'ensemble de tests est réservé à l'évaluation des performances des systèmes participants. Au cours de l'évaluation, notre système s'est classé 23e dans le résultat Coda Lab de la sous-tâche A (problème de classe binaire). Le système de classe binaire atteint une précision de 0,6135, une précision de 0,5091, un rappel de 0,7170 et une mesure F de 0,5955. Le système de sous-tâche B (problème multi-classes) est classé 22 dans les résultats de Coda Lab. Le modèle multiclasse atteint la précision 0,4158, la précision 0,4055, le rappel 0,3526 et la mesure f 0,3101.", 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام الكشف عن المفارقة الذي يشارك في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: الكشف عن المفارقة في التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية. شارك النظام في المهام الفرعية أ و ب. تناقش هذه الورقة نتائج نظامنا في التطوير والتقييم وبعد التقييم. يتم تمثيل كل فئة في مجموعة البيانات على أنها رسوم بيانية موجهة غير مرجحة. بعد ذلك ، يتم إجراء المقارنة مع كل رسم بياني للفصل ينتج عنه متجه. يستخدم هذا المتجه كميزات بواسطة خوارزمية التعلم الآلي. يتم تقييم النموذج بناءً على تعليق على الإستراتيجية. قام المنظمون بتقسيم 80٪ بشكل عشوائي (3833 مثيل) لمجموعة التدريب (المقدمة للمشارك في تدريب نظامهم) ومجموعة الاختبار 20٪ (958 مثيل). مجموعة الاختبار محجوزة لتقييم أداء أنظمة المشاركين. أثناء التقييم ، احتل نظامنا المرتبة 23 في نتيجة Coda Lab للمهمة الفرعية A (مشكلة الطبقة الثنائية). يحقق نظام الفئة الثنائية دقة 0.6135 ودقة 0.5091 واستدعاء 0.7170 وقياس F 0.5955. تم تصنيف نظام المهام الفرعية B (مشكلة متعددة الفئات) في المرتبة 22 في نتائج Coda Lab. يحقق النموذج متعدد الفئات دقة 0.4158 ودقة 0.4055 واستدعاء 0.3526 وقياس f 0.3101.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema de detección de ironía que participa en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Detección de ironía en tuits en inglés. El sistema participó en las subtareas A y B. Este documento analiza los resultados de nuestro sistema en el desarrollo, la evaluación y la evaluación posterior. Cada clase del conjunto de datos se representa como gráficos no ponderados dirigidos. Luego, la comparación se lleva a cabo con cada gráfico de clase que da como resultado un vector. Este vector se utiliza como características por el algoritmo de aprendizaje automático. El modelo se evalúa en función de una estrategia de espera. Los organizadores dividieron aleatoriamente el 80% (3833 instancias) del conjunto de entrenamiento (proporcionado al participante en la capacitación de su sistema) y el conjunto de pruebas en un 20% (958 instancias). El conjunto de pruebas está reservado para evaluar el rendimiento de los sistemas de los participantes. Durante la evaluación, nuestro sistema ocupó el puesto 23 en el Coda Lab como resultado de la subtarea A (problema de clase binaria). El sistema de clases binarias logra una precisión de 0.6135, precisión de 0.5091, recuperación de 0.7170 y medida F de 0.5955. El sistema de subtarea B (problema multiclase) ocupa el puesto 22 en los resultados de Coda Lab. El modelo multiclase logra una precisión de 0.4158, precisión de 0.4055, recuperación de 0.3526 y medida f de 0.3101.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema de detecção de ironia que participa da Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2018: Detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês. O sistema participou das subtarefas A e B. Este artigo discute os resultados do nosso sistema no desenvolvimento, avaliação e pós-avaliação. Cada classe no conjunto de dados é representada como gráficos não ponderados direcionados. Em seguida, a comparação é realizada com cada grafo de classe que resulta em um vetor. Este vetor é usado como recursos pelo algoritmo de aprendizado de máquina. O modelo é avaliado em uma estratégia de espera. Os organizadores dividiram aleatoriamente 80% (3.833 instâncias) do conjunto de treinamento (fornecido ao participante no treinamento de seu sistema) e do conjunto de teste 20% (958 instâncias). O conjunto de teste é reservado para avaliar o desempenho dos sistemas participantes. Durante a avaliação, nosso sistema ficou em 23º lugar no resultado do Coda Lab da subtarefa A (problema de classe binária). O sistema de classe binária atinge precisão 0,6135, precisão 0,5091, recall 0,7170 e medida F 0,5955. O sistema da subtarefa B (problema multiclasse) está classificado em 22º lugar nos resultados do Coda Lab. O modelo multiclasse atinge a precisão 0,4158, precisão 0,4055, recall 0,3526 e medida f 0,3101.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018 Task 3: Irony detectionに参加するIrony検出システムについて、英語のツイートで説明する。 サブタスクAとBに参加した本稿では、開発、評価、ポスト評価における当社システムの結果について説明する。 データセット内の各クラスは、指示された重み付けされていないグラフとして表されます。 次に、各クラスのグラフと比較を行い、ベクトルを得ます。 このベクトルは、機械学習アルゴリズムによって特徴として使用されます。 モデルは保留戦略で評価されます。 主催者は、80%（ 3,833例）のトレーニングセット（システムのトレーニングで参加者に提供）と20%（ 958例）のテストセットをランダムに分割した。 テストセットは、参加者システムのパフォーマンスを評価するために予約されています。 評価中、当社システムはサブタスクA （バイナリクラス問題）のCODAラボ結果で23位にランクインしました。 バイナリクラスシステムは、精度0.6135、精度0.5091、リコール0.7170、Fメジャー0.5955を達成します。 サブタスクB （マルチクラスの問題）システムは、Coda Labの結果で22位にランク付けされています。 マルチクラスモデルは、精度0.4158、精度0.4055、リコール0.3526、fメジャー0.3101を実現します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर विडंबना का पता लगाने की प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है जो SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 में भाग लेता है: अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाना। सिस्टम ने उप-कार्यों ए और बी में भाग लिया। यह पेपर विकास, मूल्यांकन और पोस्ट मूल्यांकन में हमारी प्रणाली के परिणामों पर चर्चा करता है। डेटासेट में प्रत्येक वर्ग को निर्देशित अनवेटेड ग्राफ़ के रूप में दर्शाया गया है। फिर, तुलना प्रत्येक वर्ग ग्राफ के साथ की जाती है जिसके परिणामस्वरूप एक वेक्टर होता है। इस वेक्टर का उपयोग मशीन लर्निंग एल्गोरिथ्म द्वारा सुविधाओं के रूप में किया जाता है। मॉडल का मूल्यांकन रणनीति पर पकड़ पर किया जाता है। आयोजकों ने बेतरतीब ढंग से 80% (3,833 इंस्टेंस) प्रशिक्षण सेट (प्रतिभागी को अपने सिस्टम को प्रशिक्षित करने में प्रदान किया) और परीक्षण सेट 20% (958 इंस्टेंस) को विभाजित किया। परीक्षण सेट प्रतिभागियों प्रणालियों के प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए आरक्षित है। मूल्यांकन के दौरान, हमारे सिस्टम को सबटास्क ए (बाइनरी क्लास समस्या) के कोडा लैब परिणाम में 23 वें स्थान पर रखा गया था। बाइनरी क्लास सिस्टम सटीकता 0.6135, परिशुद्धता 0.5091, 0.7170 को याद करता है और एफ माप 0.5955 प्राप्त करता है। Subtask B (बहु-वर्ग समस्या) प्रणाली को कोडा लैब परिणामों में 22 वें स्थान पर रखा गया है। multiclass मॉडल सटीकता 0.4158, परिशुद्धता 0.4055, 0.3526 याद और एफ उपाय 0.3101 प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система обнаружения иронии, которая участвует в задаче 3 SemEval-2018: обнаружение иронии в твитах на английском языке. Система участвовала в выполнении подзадач A и B. В настоящем документе обсуждаются результаты работы нашей системы в области разработки, оценки и последующей оценки. Каждый класс в наборе данных представлен в виде направленных невзвешенных графиков. Затем проводится сравнение с каждым графом классов, в результате которого получается вектор. Этот вектор используется в качестве признака алгоритмом машинного обучения. Модель оценивается по стратегии приостановки. Организаторы случайным образом разделили 80% (3833 экземпляра) обучающего набора (предоставленного участнику обучения в их системе) и 20%(958 экземпляров). Тестовый набор зарезервирован для оценки эффективности систем участников. Во время оценки наша система заняла 23 место в результате Coda Lab по подзадаче A (задача двоичного класса). Система двоичных классов обеспечивает точность 0,6135, точность 0,5091, вызов 0,7170 и меру F 0,5955. Система подзадачи B (многоклассовая проблема) занимает 22-е место в результатах Coda Lab. Модель с несколькими классами обеспечивает точность 0,4158, точность 0,4055, отзыв 0,3526 и измерение 0,3101.', 'zh': '本文引参SemEval-2018务3:英语推刺检测之统。 统与子职 A 和 B。 本文论我们的系统在开发,评估和后期评中的结果。 数集之类,皆有向无权重图。 然后校类图而得一向量。 此向量以机器学算法为特征。 其模形于策暂停者,估之。 组织者随机分80%(3,833实例)练集(给其统参与者)、试集20%(958例)。 留该试集以评估参与者系统之性。 凡评估之际,统于子职A(二进制类)者Coda实验室排名第23位也。 二进制类统至精度0.6135,精度0.5091,召还0.7170与F测0.5955。 子职B(多类)系统于Coda实验室排名第22位。 多模之精为0.4158,精度为0.4055,召率为0.3526,f量值为0.3101。', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras braite Irony a ghlacann páirt i SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Brath íoróin i tweets Béarla. Ghlac an córas páirt i bhfo-thascanna A agus B. Pléann an páipéar seo torthaí ár gcóras maidir le forbairt, meastóireacht agus iarmheastóireacht. Léirítear gach rang sa tacar sonraí mar ghraif dhírithe neamhualaithe. Ansin, déantar comparáid le gach graf ranga a mbíonn veicteoir mar thoradh air. Úsáideann algartam meaisínfhoghlama an veicteoir seo mar ghnéithe. Déantar an tsamhail a mheas de réir straitéise stoptha. Roinn na heagraithe go randamach 80% (3,833 chás) tacair oiliúna (a cuireadh ar fáil don rannpháirtí agus a gcóras á oiliúint) agus tacair tástála 20% (958 cás). Cuirtear an tacar tástála in áirithe chun feidhmíocht chórais na rannpháirtithe a mheas. Le linn na meastóireachta, bhí ár gcóras rangaithe 23 i dtoradh Coda Lab ar fhothasc A (fadhb aicme dhénártha). Baineann an córas aicme dénártha amach cruinneas 0.6135, cruinneas 0.5091, athghairm 0.7170 agus tomhas F 0.5955. Tá an córas fothasc B (fadhb ilranga) rangaithe sa 22ú háit i dtorthaí Coda Lab. Baineann an tsamhail multiclass amach an cruinneas 0.4158, cruinneas 0.4055, cuimhne 0.3526 agus f tomhas 0.3101.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα ανίχνευσης ειρωνείας που συμμετέχει στο έργο 3: ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα αγγλικά tweets. Το σύστημα συμμετείχε στις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες Α και Β. Η παρούσα εργασία συζητά τα αποτελέσματα του συστήματός μας στην ανάπτυξη, αξιολόγηση και μετα-αξιολόγηση. Κάθε τάξη στο σύνολο δεδομένων αντιπροσωπεύεται ως κατευθυνόμενα μη σταθμισμένα γραφήματα. Στη συνέχεια, η σύγκριση γίνεται με κάθε γράφημα τάξης που οδηγεί σε ένα διάνυσμα. Αυτό το διάνυσμα χρησιμοποιείται ως χαρακτηριστικά από αλγόριθμο μηχανικής μάθησης. Το μοντέλο αξιολογείται με βάση τη στρατηγική αναμονής. Οι διοργανωτές διαχωρίζουν τυχαία 80% (3,833 περιπτώσεις) εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο (παρέχεται στον συμμετέχοντα στην εκπαίδευση του συστήματός τους) και δοκιμαστικό σύνολο 20%(958 περιπτώσεις). Το σετ δοκιμών προορίζεται για την αξιολόγηση της απόδοσης των συστημάτων συμμετεχόντων. Κατά τη διάρκεια της αξιολόγησης, το σύστημά μας κατατάχθηκε 23 στο αποτέλεσμα του εργαστηρίου Coda της υποτάξεως Α (πρόβλημα δυαδικής τάξης). Το δυαδικό σύστημα κατηγορίας επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 0.6135, ακρίβεια 0.5091, ανάκληση 0.7170 και μέτρο 0.5955. Το σύστημα υποστάσεων Β (πρόβλημα πολλαπλών κατηγοριών) κατατάσσεται 22 στα αποτελέσματα του εργαστηρίου. Το μοντέλο πολλαπλών κλάσεων επιτυγχάνει την ακρίβεια 0.4158, ακρίβεια 0.4055, ανάκληση 0.3526 και μέτρο 0.3101.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 3. feladatban részt vevő Irony Detection rendszert angol tweetekben. A rendszer részt vett az A és B alcsoportokban. Ez a tanulmány a rendszerünk fejlesztési, értékelési és utóértékelési eredményeit tárgyalja. Az adathalmaz minden osztályát irányított, súlytalan grafikonként jelenítik meg. Ezután az összehasonlítást minden osztálygrafonnal végezzük, ami vektort eredményez. Ezt a vektort a gépi tanulási algoritmus jellemzőjeként használja. A modell értékelése a stratégia várakozásával történik. A szervezők véletlenszerűen felosztották a 80%-ot (3 833 példa) képzéskészletet (amit a résztvevő a rendszerük oktatásában biztosított) és a tesztkészletet 20%-ot (958 példa). A tesztkészlet a résztvevői rendszerek teljesítményének értékelésére szolgál. Az értékelés során rendszerünk 23. helyezett lett a Coda Lab eredményében az A részfeladat (bináris osztály probléma). A bináris osztályú rendszer 0,6135 pontosságot, 0,5091 pontosságot, 0,7170 visszahívást és F mérést 0,5955 ér el. A B részfeladat (többosztályú probléma) rendszer 22. helyen áll a Coda Lab eredményeiben. A többszálas modell 0,4158 pontosságot, 0,4055 pontosságot, 0,3526 visszahívást és 0,3101 pontosságot ér el.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუნტი აღწერს იპონიის განახლების სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval-2018 დაწყებული სამუშაო დავალებში: იპონიის განახლება ინგლისური tweets-ში. სისტემა A და B-ში დაწყვეტილია. ეს წიგნი ჩვენი სისტემას შედეგების განვითარებაში, განსაზღვრებაში და პოსტის განსაზღვრებაში. ყველა კლასი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში იქნება, როგორც განსაზღვრებული არაფერი გრაფიკი. შემდეგ, ყველა კლასის გრაფიკით, რომელიც გვექტორის შემდეგ გადასრულება. ეს გვქტორი გამოყენებულია როგორც მაქსინის სწავლის ალგორიტიმზე. მოდელის შესახებ სტრატიგიის შესახებ გაუმუშავება. ორგანიზატორები შემთხვევაში 80% (3 833 ინსტენსტი) გაყოფილი სტრინციის ნაწილი (გაყოფილი თავის სისტემის სტრინციაში) და 20%(958 ინსტენსტი გაყოფილი სტრინციები. ტესტის სექტის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი სექტიმების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი. ჩვენი სისტემა კოდეა ლაბოში A-ის (ბიუნარი კლასის პრობლემა) წარმოდგენა 23 წარმოდგენა. ბიუნარი კლასის სისტემა მიიღება 0.6135, precision 0.5091, შემხსენება 0.7170 და F ზომა 0.5955. სისტემა B (მრავალკლასის პრობლემა) პრობლემაში 22 წერტილია Coda Lab წერტილებში. მულტიკლასის მოდელის წარმოდგინდება 0.4158, წარმოდგინობა 0.4055, შემხსენება 0.3526 და f ზომა 0.3101.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында қатысу үшін Ирония анықтау жүйесін түсіндіреді. 3- ағылшын tweets тізімінде ирония анықтау. Бұл қағаз жүйеңіздің жасау, оқу және соңғы оқу жүйесінің нәтижелерін талқылады. Деректер жиындағы әрбір класы бағытталмаған графиктер ретінде көрсетіледі. Содан кейін, салыстырылуы вектордың нәтижесі бар әрбір класс графикамен істейді. Бұл вектор машина оқыту алгоритмі ретінде қолданылады. Бұл үлгі стратегиясында бағалады. Орындаушылар кездейсоқ 80% (3 833 инстанциялар) оқыту бағдарламасын бөліп, 20%(958 инстанцияларды тексеру бағдарламасына қатынады. Қатысушылар жүйесінің істемін бағалау үшін сынақтар жинақталған. Бағалау кезінде, біздің жүйеміз Кода лабораториясының A (бинарлық классының мәселесі) ішкі сұраныс нәтижесінде 23 деп жазылды. Бинарлық класс жүйесі 0, 6135, дұрыс 0, 5091, 0, 7170 және F өлшемі 0, 5955 деп еске алады. B асты сұраныс (көп класс мәселесі) жүйесі Coda Lab нәтижесінде 22- жолды. Көп класс үлгісі 0, 4158, дұрыс 0, 4055, 0, 3526 және f өлшемі 0, 3101 деп еске алады.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema di rilevamento dell'ironia che partecipa a SemEval-2018 Task 3: rilevamento dell'ironia nei tweet inglesi. Il sistema ha partecipato alle sottoattività A e B. Questo articolo discute i risultati del nostro sistema nello sviluppo, valutazione e post valutazione. Ogni classe nel set di dati è rappresentata come grafici diretti non ponderati. Poi, il confronto viene effettuato con ogni grafico di classe che si traduce in un vettore. Questo vettore è usato come caratteristiche dall'algoritmo di apprendimento automatico. Il modello viene valutato in attesa di strategia. Gli organizzatori hanno diviso casualmente l'80% (3.833 istanze) set di formazione (fornito al partecipante durante l'addestramento del proprio sistema) e set di test 20% (958 istanze). Il set di test è riservato per valutare le prestazioni dei sistemi partecipanti. Durante la valutazione, il nostro sistema si è classificato 23 nel risultato Coda Lab della sottomissione A (problema di classe binaria). Il sistema di classe binaria raggiunge precisione 0.6135, precisione 0.5091, richiamo 0.7170 e F misura 0.5955. Il sistema sottotask B (problema multi-classe) è classificato 22 nei risultati Coda Lab. Il modello multiclass raggiunge la precisione 0,4158, la precisione 0,4055, il richiamo 0,3526 e la misura f 0,3101.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama ironijos aptikimo sistema, kuri dalyvauja „SemEval-2018“ 3 užduotyje: ironijos aptikimas anglų kalba. Sistema dalyvavo A ir B paklausimuose. Šiame dokumente aptariami mūsų sistemos rezultatai rengiant, vertinant ir po vertinimo. Kiekviena duomenų rinkinio klasė pateikiama kaip nukreiptas svertinis grafikas. Tada palyginama su kiekvienu klasės grafiku, kuris sukelia vektorių. Šis vektorius naudojamas kaip savybės pagal mašinų mokymosi algoritmą. Modelis vertinamas atsižvelgiant į strategiją. Organizatoriai atsitiktinai padalijo 80 % (3 833 atvejų) mokymo rinkinį (suteiktą dalyviui mokymo sistemoje) ir bandymų rinkinį sudarė 20 % (958 atvejai). Bandymų rinkinys skirtas dalyvių sistemų veiksmingumui įvertinti. Vertinimo metu mūsų sistema buvo 23 klasės Coda laboratorijos A (dviejų klasių problema) rezultate. The binary class system achieves accuracy 0.6135, precision 0.5091, recall 0.7170 and F measure 0.5955.  B paklausos (daugelio klasių problema) sistema Coda laboratorijos rezultatuose yra 22 klasė. Daugiaklasis modelis pasiekia tikslumą 0,4158, tikslumą 0,4055, atšaukimą 0,3526 ir f matavimą 0,3101.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 3-ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഐറോണി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു: ഇ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്തിരിക്കുന്നത് A, B എന്നിവയും പങ്കാളികളാണ്. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വി ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ ഓരോ ക്ലാസ്സും നേര്\u200dവഴിയില്ലാത്ത ഗ്രാഫുകളായി പ്രതിനിധിയിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ഒരു വെക്റ്റര്\u200dക്ക് കൊടുക്കുന്ന ഓരോ ക്ലാസ് ഗ്രാഫുമായി താല്\u200dപ്പര്യം നടത്തുന്നു. യന്ത്രം പഠിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പിടിയില്\u200d നിന്ന് മോഡല്\u200d വിലയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. സംഘടനക്കാര്\u200d 80% (3,833 അവസ്ഥ) പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d പങ്കാളികള്\u200dക്ക് (അവരുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പങ്കാളികള്\u200dക്ക് നല്\u200dകിയിരിക്കുന്നു) പരീക്ഷണത് പങ്കുകാളികളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനം പരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d പരീക്ഷ സജ്ജീകരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പരിഗണനത്തിനുള്ള സമയത്ത്, ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കോഡ ലാബില്\u200d 23 വയസ്സുണ്ടായിരുന്നു. സബ്ബട്ട് A (ബൈനരി ക് ബൈനരി ക്ലാസ്സിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റം 0. 6135, പരിഗണന 0. 5091, 0. 7170 എന്നിവയെ ഓര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുക 0. 5955. ബി (പല-ക്ലാസ്സ് പ്രശ്നം) സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d കോഡ ലാബിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങളില്\u200d 22 നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. മള്\u200dട്ടിക്ലാസ്സിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d 0. 4158, 0. 4055, 0. 3526 എന്നിട്ട് 0. 3101 ന്റെ തുല്യത്തില്\u200d എത്തുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem pengesan Irony yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: pengesan Irony dalam tweet Inggeris. Sistem ini berpartisipasi dalam subtanya A dan B. Kertas ini membahas keputusan sistem kita dalam pembangunan, penilaian dan penilaian selepas. Setiap kelas dalam set data diwakili sebagai graf tidak berat direksi. Kemudian, perbandingan dilakukan dengan setiap graf kelas yang menghasilkan vektor. Vektor ini digunakan sebagai ciri-ciri oleh algoritma pembelajaran mesin. The model is evaluated on a hold on strategy.  Pengurus secara rawak membahagi 80% (3,833 kes) set latihan (diberikan kepada peserta dalam latihan sistem mereka) dan ujian ditetapkan 20% (958 kes). Set ujian disimpan untuk menilai prestasi sistem peserta. Semasa penilaian, sistem kami ditangkap 23 dalam hasil Coda Lab subtask A (masalah kelas binari). Sistem kelas binari mencapai ketepatan 0.6135, ketepatan 0.5091, ingat 0.7170 dan F ukuran 0.5955. Sistem sub-tanya B (masalah kelas berbilang) ditandai 22 dalam hasil Lab Coda. Model berkelas berbilang mencapai ketepatan 0.4158, ketepatan 0.4055, ingat 0.3526 dan f ukuran 0.3101.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот за детекција на иронија кој учествува во SemEval-2018 задача 3: детекција на иронија на англиски твитови. Системот учествуваше во подпрашањата А и Б. Овој документ ги дискутира резултатите на нашиот систем во развојот, проценката и пост-проценката. Секоја класа во датотеката е претставена како директирани нетежирани графики. Потоа, споредбата се спроведува со секој клас граф кој резултира со вектор. Овој вектор се користи како карактеристики од алгоритм за машинско учење. Моделот е проценет под одржување на стратегијата. Организаторите случајно поделија 80 % (3.833 случаи) набор обуки (обезбедени на учесникот во обуката на нивниот систем) и тестовите поставија 20 % (958 случаи). The test set is reserved to evaluate the performance of participants systems.  За време на проценката, нашиот систем се рангираше на 23 во резултатот на кода лабораторијата на подпрашањето А (бинарен проблем на класата). Бинарниот систем постигнува прецизност 0,6135, прецизност 0,5091, повлекување 0,7170 и F мерка 0,5955. Системот на подпрашање Б (мултикласни проблеми) е рангиран 22 во резултатите на Coda Lab. Мултикласниот модел ја постигна точноста 0,4158, прецизноста 0,4055, повлекувањето 0,3526 и мерката f 0,3101.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema ta’ detezzjoni tal-ironja li tipparteċipa f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 3: detezzjoni tal-ironja f’tweets Ingliż. Is-sistema pparteċipat fis-sottomistoqsijiet A u B. Dan id-dokument jiddiskuti r-riżultati tas-sistema tagħna fl-iżvilupp, l-evalwazzjoni u l-evalwazzjoni ta’ wara. Kull klassi fis-sett tad-dejta hija rrappreżentata bħala grafiċi mhux peżati diretti. Imbagħad, it-tqabbil isir ma’ kull graff tal-klassi li jirriżulta f’vettur. Dan il-vettur jintuża bħala karatteristiċi mill-algoritmu tat-tagħlim tal-magni. Il-mudell huwa evalwat fuq żmien twil mill-istrateġija. L-organizzaturi maqsuma b’mod każwali 80% (3,833 każ) sett ta’ taħriġ (ipprovdut lill-parteċipant fit-taħriġ tas-sistema tagħhom) u l-ittestjar iffissaw 20% (958 każ). Is-sett tat-test huwa riżervat biex jevalwa l-prestazzjoni tas-sistemi tal-parteċipanti. During the evaluation, our system ranked 23 in the Coda Lab result of the subtask A (binary class problem).  Is-sistema tal-klassi binarja tikseb preċiżjoni 0.6135, preċiżjoni 0.5091, tfakkar lura 0.7170 u miżura F 0.5955. Is-sistema ta’ sottomistoqsijiet B (problema ta’ diversi klassijiet) hija kklassifikata 22 fir-riżultati tal-Coda Lab. The multiclass model achieves the accuracy 0.4158, precision 0.4055, recall 0.3526 and f measure 0.3101.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-2018 Task 3-д оролцож байгаа Төмөр нээлтийн системийг тодорхойлж байна. Энэ цаас нь бидний системийн үр дүнг хөгжүүлэх, үнэлгээ, дараагийн үнэлгээ дэвшүүлэхэд тусалдаг. Өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн хичээл бүр жингээгүй график гэж дүрслэгддэг. Дараа нь, харьцуулалт нь векторын үр дүнтэй хичээл бүрт хийгддэг. Энэ вектор машин суралцах алгоритмын хувьд хэрэглэгддэг. Загвар нь стратегийг баталж байхдаа үнэлдэг. Организагчид санамсаргүй 80% (3.833 instances) сургалтын сургалтыг хуваалцаж (системийг сургалтын оролцогчдын тулд) 20%(958 instances шалгаж байлаа. Шинжлэх суурь нь оролцогчдын системийн үйл ажиллагааг үнэлэхэд хадгалагдсан. Үүнийг үнэлэх үед бидний систем Кодаа Лаборт А-ын хоёр дахь асуудлын үр дүнд 23 байдаг. Хоёр дахь хичээлийн систем 0.6135, 0.5091, 0.7170, F 0.5955 хэмжээнд тодорхой байдаг. Кода лабораторийн үр дүнд B-н суудал (олон ангийны асуудал) систем 22-р дүрслэгдсэн. Олон-классын загвар 0.4158, 0.4055, 0.3526, f 0.3101 хэмжээнд тодорхой байдаг.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano system wykrywania Irony uczestniczący w SemEval-2018 Task 3: Wykrywanie irony w angielskich tweetach. System uczestniczył w podzadaniach A i B. W niniejszym artykule omówiono wyniki naszego systemu w rozwoju, ocenie i ocenie post. Każda klasa w zbiorze danych jest reprezentowana jako ukierunkowane nieważone wykresy. Następnie porównanie przeprowadza się z każdym wykresem klasy, który powoduje wektor. Ten wektor jest używany jako cechy przez algorytm uczenia maszynowego. Model jest oceniany na podstawie strategii hold on. Organizatorzy losowo dzielą 80% (3,833 instancje) zestaw szkoleniowy (dostarczony uczestnikowi szkolenia swojego systemu) i zestaw testowy 20%(958 instancje). Zestaw testowy jest zarezerwowany do oceny wydajności systemów uczestników. Podczas oceny nasz system umieścił 23 w wyniku Coda Lab podzadania A (problem klasy binarnej). System klasy binarnej osiąga dokładność 0.6135, precyzję 0.5091, przywołanie 0.7170 i pomiar F 0.5955. System podzadania B (problem wieloklasowy) jest klasyfikowany 22 w wynikach Coda Lab. Model wieloklasowy osiąga dokładność 0.4158, precyzję 0.4055, przywołanie 0.3526 i pomiar f 0.3101.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver Ironioppdagingssystemet som deltar i halvEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Ironioppdaging i engelske tweeter. Systemet delta i subtaskane A og B. Denne papiret diskuterer resultatet av systemet vår i utviklinga, evalueringa og post-evalueringa. Kvar klasse i datasettet vert representert som direkte uvekt grafikk. Deretter vert sammenlikninga utført med kvar klassegraf som resulterer i ein vektor. Denne vektoren vert brukt som funksjonar av maskinelæringsalgoritme. Modellen er evaluert på ein hold-strategi. Organisatorene deler tilfeldig 80% (3 833 instansar) opplæring sett (tilgjengeleg deltakaren i opplæring av systemet sin) og testet sett 20%(958 instansar. Testsettet er reservert for å evaluera utviklinga av deltakarsystemet. I løpet av evalueringa, systemet vår rangert 23 i Coda Lab-resultatet av subtspørjinga A (binærklasseproblem). Binærklassesystemet gjer nøyaktighet 0,6135, nøyaktighet 0,5091, rekna på 0,7170 og F målet 0,5955. Underspørjingssystemet B (multiklasseproblem) er sett opp 22 i Coda Lab-resultatet. Det fleirklassesmodellen oppnår nøyaktighet 0,4158, nøyaktighet 0,4055, rekna på 0,3526 og f målet 0,3101.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran nidaamka aqoonsiga ee ka qayb gala shaqada SemEval-2018 3: Garashada ajaaniga ee ku qoran tweetka Ingiriiska. Systemku wuxuu ka qayb galay meelaha hoose u dhigista A iyo B. Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu ka sheekaynayaa resultinta nidaamka horumarinta, qiimeynta iyo qiimeynta ka dib. Fasalka macluumaadka waxaa looga jeedaa tusaale aan la hagin. Markaas is-barbardhigga waxaa lagu sameeyaa fasalka oo dhan, taas oo sababto wado. This vector is used as features by machine learning algorithm.  Tusaalada waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa qoraal lagu haysto. Waxqabayaashu waxay si rasmi ah u kala qeybiyeen 80 boqol (3,833 dhacdooyinka) waxbarashada (taas oo la siiyay kuwa ka qayb galay waxbarashada systemkooda) imtixaanka waxaa la dhigay 20% (waqtiyada 958). Lambarka imtixaanka waxaa loo kaydiyey in lagu qiimeeyo sameynta nidaamka dadka ka qeybqaatay. Inta lagu qiimeynayo, nidaamkayagu wuxuu ka soo baxay 23 sano oo ka soo baxay Coda Lab sababtiisa subxabsiga A (dhibaatada fasalka labaad). Tirada fasalka labaad waxay gaadhaa saxda 0.6135, saxda 0.5091, xasuuso 0.7170 iyo F qiyaasta 0.5955. Sub-task B (dhibaato badan) nidaamka waxaa lagu saleeyaa 22 midhihiisa Coda Lab. Tusaale badan wuxuu gaadhaa saxda 0.4158, saxda 0.4055, xusuuso 0.3526 iyo f qiyaasta 0.3101.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න පද්ධතිය, සම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩේ 3: අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න ඉංග්\u200dරීසි  පද්ධතිය A සහ B වලට සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙනවා. දත්ත සෙට් වල හැම ප්\u200dරධානයක්ම ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැති විශාල චිත්\u200dරපට වගේ. ඊට පස්සේ, වෙක්ටර් වලට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන හැම ප්\u200dරමාණ ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා. මේ වෙක්ටර් පද්ධතිය ඉගෙන ගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් වලින් භාවිත කරනවා. මොඩේල් එක විශ්වාස කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වෙනුවෙන්. සංයෝජනකයෝ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක 80% (3,833 ස්ථානය) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සූදානම් කරනවා (ඔවුන්ගේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් සුරක්ෂා කරලා අංශිත වැඩසටහන් කරන්න. විශ්ලේෂණය වෙලාවට, අපේ පද්ධතියේ කෝඩා ලේබ් එකේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය A (බායිනාරි ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) ගැන බායිනාරි ක්ලාස් පද්ධතිය 0.6135, 0.5091, 0.7170 සහ F පද්ධතිය 0.5955. කෝඩා ලැබ් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින් අභිප්\u200dරශ්නය B (විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නය) පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නය 22 ක් පද විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණය 0.4158, විශේෂ 0.4055, 0.3526 මතක කරන්න සහ f මතක 0.3101.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul de detectare a ironiei care participă la SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detectarea ironiei în tweeturile în limba engleză. Sistemul a participat la subactivitățile A și B. Această lucrare discută rezultatele sistemului nostru în dezvoltare, evaluare și post evaluare. Fiecare clasă din setul de date este reprezentată ca grafice direcționate necântărite. Apoi, comparația este efectuată cu fiecare grafic de clasă care rezultă într-un vector. Acest vector este folosit ca caracteristici de algoritmul de învățare automată. Modelul este evaluat în așteptarea strategiei. Organizatorii au împărțit aleatoriu 80% (3.833 instanțe) setul de instruire (furnizat participantului la instruirea sistemului său) și setul de testare 20% (958 instanțe). Setul de teste este rezervat pentru a evalua performanța sistemelor participanților. În timpul evaluării, sistemul nostru a clasat 23 în rezultatul Coda Lab al subactivității A (problema clasei binare). Sistemul de clasă binară atinge precizie 0.6135, precizie 0.5091, rechemare 0.7170 și F măsură 0.5955. Sistemul de subactivitate B (problemă multi-clasă) este clasat 22 în rezultatele Coda Lab. Modelul multiclass atinge acuratețea 0,4158, precizia 0,4055, rechemarea 0,3526 și măsura f 0,3101.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem detektiva Ironije koji sudjeluje u zadatku 3. iz polu Evala-2018: detektiva Ironija na engleskim tweetima. Sistem je sudjelovao u podkazama A i B. Ovaj papir razgovara o rezultatima našeg sistema u razvoju, procjenu i post procjenu. Svaka klasa u setu podataka predstavlja se kao direktivni neoteženi grafik. Onda se usporedba provede sa svakim klasnom grafikom koji rezultira vektoru. Ovaj vektor se koristi kao karakteristika algoritma za učenje mašine. Model se procjenjuje na održavanju strategije. Organizatori su slučajno podelili 80% (3.833 instanci) obuku (pruženo učesniku u obuci njihovog sistema) i testiranje postavilo 20%(958 instancija). Nastava testiranja je rezervisana kako bi procenila provedbu sustava sudionika. Tokom procjene, naš sistem je u laboratoriji Coda rezultat podpitanja A (problem sa binarnim klasom). Sistem binarne klase postiže tačnost 0,6135, preciznost 0,5091, sećate se 0,7170 i F mjere 0,5955. Sistem podpitanja B (multiklasni problem) je u rezultatima Coda Lab-a 22. Multiklasni model postiže tačnost 0,4158, preciznost 0,4055, sjeti se 0,3526 i f mjere 0,3101.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver Irony Detection System som deltar i SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection i engelska tweets. Systemet deltog i deluppgifterna A och B. Denna uppsats diskuterar resultaten av vårt system i utveckling, utvärdering och efterutvärdering. Varje klass i datauppsättningen representeras som riktade ovägtade grafer. Sedan utförs jämförelsen med varje klassgraf vilket resulterar i en vektor. Denna vektor används som funktioner av maskininlärningsalgoritm. Modellen utvärderas i avvaktan på strategi. Arrangörerna delade slumpmässigt upp 80% (3 833 instanser) träningsset (tillhandahållit deltagarna i utbildningen av sitt system) och testset 20% (958 instanser). Testuppsättningen är reserverad för att utvärdera deltagarsystemens prestanda. Under utvärderingen rankades vårt system 23 i Coda Lab-resultatet av underuppgiften A (binärt klassproblem). Det binära klasssystemet uppnår noggrannhet 0,6135, precision 0,5091, återkallelse 0,7170 och F mått 0,5955. Underuppgiften B (flerklassproblem) är rankad 22 i Coda Lab resultat. Multiglasmodellen uppnår noggrannheten 0,4158, precisionen 0,4055, återkallelse 0,3526 och f mått 0,3101.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the Irony detection system that participates in SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets. سیسٹم نے A اور B سٹسٹسٹ میں مشارک کیا یہ کاغذ ہمارے سیسٹم کے نتائج توسعہ، ارزیابی اور پوسٹ ارزیابی میں بحث کرتا ہے. ڈاٹ سٹ میں ہر کلاس کی نمایش کی جاتی ہے بغیروزن گراف کی طرح۔ پھر، مقایسہ ہر کلاس گراف کے ساتھ کیا جاتا ہے جو ایک ویکتور میں نتیجہ پاتا ہے. یہ ویکتور ماشین یاد لینے الگوریتم کے ذریعہ ویکتور کو ویکتوروں کے طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. موڈل ایک طریقہ پر محسوس کیا جاتا ہے۔ سازمان کرنے والوں نے تقدیر کے طور پر 80% (3.833 instances) ٹرینگ سٹ (ان کے سیسٹم کی آموزش میں شرکت کرنے والوں کے لئے) اور آزمائش سٹ 20%(958 instances) کو تقدیر کیا۔ ٹیسٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ شرکت کرنے والوں کی فعالیت کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے ذخیره کیا گیا ہے. ارزیابی کے درمیان، ہماری سیسٹم کو کوڈا لاب میں 23 درجے کا نتیجہ ہے A (دوئناری کلاس مسئلہ) کا۔ بیناری کلاس سیسٹم 0.6135، دقیق 0.5091، 0.7170 اور F اندازہ 0.5955 کو یاد کرو۔ سوپٹ پرس ب (ملتی کلاس مسئلہ) سیسٹم کوڈا لاب نتیجے میں 22 رینگ ہے۔ Multiclass model achieves the accuracy 0.4158, precision 0.4055, remember 0.3526 and f measure 0.3101.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval-2018 பணியில் பகிர்ந்து கொள்ளும் ஐரோனி கண்டுபிடிப்பு அமைப்பை விளக்குகிறது: ஆங்கிலத்தில் கண்டுப A மற்றும் B துணை பணிகளில் அமைப்பு பங்கிட்டது. இந்த காகிதத்தில் எங்கள் கணினியின் முடிவுகளை உருவாக்கி, மதிப்பிடுதல் மற்றும தரவுத்தளத்தில் உள்ள ஒவ்வொரு வகுப்பும் காட்டப்படாத வரைப்படமாக குறிக்கப்படும். பிறகு, ஒப்பீடு ஒவ்வொரு வகுப்பு வரைப்படத்துடன் செயல்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, அது வெக்டார் ஆகும். இயந்திரத்தை கற்றுக் கொண்டு இந்த நெறியின் குணங்களாக பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. The model is evaluated on a hold on strategy.  அமைப்பாளர்கள் குறிப்பில் 80% (3,833 நிகழ்வுகள்) பயிற்சி அமைப்புகளுக்கு (அவர்கள் கணினியில் பங்காரர்களுக்கு வழங்கப்பட்ட) மற்றும் சோதனை  பரிசோதனை அமைப்புகளின் செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிட வேண்டும் மதிப்பிடும் போது, எங்கள் அமைப்பு கோடா லாப் துணை செயல் A (இரு வகுப்பு பிரச்சனை)யின் முடிவில் 23 வரிசைப்பட்டது. இருநிலை வகுப்பு அமைப்பு 0. 6135, துல்லியம் 0. 5091, 0. 7170 மற்றும் F அளவு 0. 5955 ஆகும். துணை பணி B (பல- வகுப்பு பிரச்சனை) அமைப்பு கோடா லாப் முடிவுகளில் 22 வரிசைப்படுத்தப்பட்டது. பல வகுப்பு மாதிரி 0. 4158, துல்லியம் 0. 4055, 0. 3526 மற்றும் f அளவு 0. 3101.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 Vazifa 3: Ingliz tweetidagi Iron qidirish tizimini anglatadi. Name Maʼlumotlar sahifadagi har bir sinfi oʻrnatilmagan grafik sifatida koʻrsatiladi. Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector.  Name Usul strategiya bilan qiymatiladi. Tashkilot 80% (3 833 dastur) taʼminlovchilar tizimning qismlariga ega bo'lganligini o'rnatadi va 20% (958 xususiyatlar) oʻrnatildi. Name Tavalu paytida, bizning tizimmiz Coda Lab'da 23 ta'qishni o'zgartiradi. Ikkita sinf tizimi 0. 6135 tasdiqligini olib tashladi, 0. 5091 murakkab 0. 7170 va F tizimni 0. 5955 davomida eslab qolish. Bu tub vazifa B (bir necha darajada muammo) tizim Coda Lab natijalarida 22 rangi. Koʻproq sinfning modeli 0.4158 murakkab 0.4055, 0.3526 va f ўлчовни 0.3101ni eslab qoladi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống phát hiện phòng muộn mà tham gia vào nhiệm vụ SemEvl-thẩm 8 3: phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter của người Anh. Hệ thống đã tham gia vào phần A và B. B ài này thảo luận về kết quả của hệ thống trong việc phát triển, đánh giá và đánh giá sau. Mỗi lớp trong tập tin được đại diện như những biểu đồ chỉ đạo không có tám. Sau đó, so sánh được thực hiện với mỗi đồ thị lớp dẫn đến một véc- tơ. Giá trị này được dùng như tính năng theo thuật toán học máy. Mô hình này được đánh giá dựa trên chiến lược. Các tổ chức chia rẽ ngẫu nhiên 80= (trường hợp 3,833) tập huấn (cung cấp cho người tham gia huấn luyện hệ thống của họ) và kiểm tra tập hợp 9958 Name Bộ thử nghiệm được dành riêng để đánh giá khả năng của hệ thống diễn viên. Trong phần đánh giá, hệ thống được xếp hạng 23 trong kết quả của Coda Lab, của phần A (phân loại nhị phân). Hệ thống phân loại nhị phân đạt độ chính xác 0.635, độ chính xác 0.500, triệu hồi 0.7170 và F thước đo 0.595. Lớp B (vấn đề đa lớp) được xếp hạng 22 trong kết quả của Coda Lab. Mô hình đa mẫu đạt độ chính xác 0.41, độ chính xác 0', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва системата за откриване на ирония, която участва в задача 3: откриване на ирония в английски туитове. Системата участва в подзадачите А и Б. Настоящата статия разглежда резултатите от нашата система при разработването, оценката и следоценката. Всеки клас в набора от данни е представен като насочени неотеглени графики. След това сравнението се извършва с всяка класа графика, която води до вектор. Този вектор се използва като функции от алгоритъм за машинно обучение. Моделът се оценява на задръжка на стратегията. Организаторите случайно разделиха 80% (3 833 инстанции) тренировъчен комплект (предоставен на участника в обучението на тяхната система) и тестващ комплект 20% (958 инстанции). Тестовият комплект е запазен за оценка на ефективността на системите на участниците. По време на оценката нашата система се класира на 23 в резултат на подзадачата А (проблем с двоичен клас). Системата с двоичен клас постига точност 0,6135, точност 0,5091, връщане 0,7170 и мярка 0,5955. Подзадачата Б (многокласов проблем) е класирана на 22 място в резултатите от Кода Лаборатория. Многокласният модел постига точност 0,4158, точност 0,4055, връщане 0,3526 и мярка 0,3101.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver det Irony Detection system, der deltager i SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Irony Detection i engelske tweets. Systemet deltog i underopgaverne A og B. I denne artikel diskuteres resultaterne af vores system i udvikling, evaluering og efterevaluering. Hver klasse i datasættet repræsenteres som rettede uvægtede grafer. Derefter udføres sammenligningen med hver klassegraf, som resulterer i en vektor. Denne vektor bruges som funktioner af machine learning algoritme. Modellen evalueres på et hold på strategi. Arrangørerne delte tilfældigt 80% (3.833 forekomster) træningssæt (leveret til deltageren i træningen af deres system) og testsæt 20% (958 forekomster). Testsættet er forbeholdt til at evaluere deltagernes systemers ydeevne. Under evalueringen rangerede vores system 23 i Coda Lab resultatet af underopgaven A (binær klasse problem). Det binære klassesystem opnår nøjagtighed 0,6135, præcision 0,5091, tilbagekaldelse 0,7170 og F måling 0,5955. Underopgaven B (multi-class problem) systemet er placeret 22 i Coda Lab resultater. Multiclass modellen opnår nøjagtigheden 0,4158, præcisionen 0,4055, tilbagekaldelse 0,3526 og f måling 0,3101.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het Irony detection systeem dat deelneemt aan SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in Engelse tweets. Het systeem nam deel aan de subtaken A en B. Deze paper bespreekt de resultaten van ons systeem in de ontwikkeling, evaluatie en post evaluatie. Elke klasse in de dataset wordt weergegeven als gerichte ongewegen grafieken. Vervolgens wordt de vergelijking uitgevoerd met elke klassegrafiek die resulteert in een vector. Deze vector wordt gebruikt als kenmerken door machine learning algoritme. Het model wordt geëvalueerd op basis van een hold on strategie. De organisatoren splitsen willekeurig 80% (3,833 instances) trainingsset (verstrekt aan de deelnemer aan het trainen van hun systeem) en testset 20%(958 instances). De testset is gereserveerd om de prestaties van deelnemerssystemen te evalueren. Tijdens de evaluatie heeft ons systeem 23 gerangschikt in het Coda Lab resultaat van de subtaak A (binair class problem). Het binaire klassensysteem bereikt nauwkeurigheid 0.6135, precisie 0.5091, recall 0.7170 en F meting 0.5955. Het subtaak B (multi-class problem) systeem staat 22 in Coda Lab resultaten. Het multiclass model bereikt de nauwkeurigheid 0.4158, precisie 0.4055, recall 0.3526 en f meting 0.3101.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav detektiva Ironija koji sudjeluje u zadatku 3. polovičnog ispitivanja 2018. godine: detektiva Ironija na engleskim tweetima. Sistem je sudjelovao u podstavama A i B. Ovaj papir razgovara o rezultatima našeg sustava u razvoju, procjeni i post procjeni. Svaka klasa u setu podataka predstavlja se kao navedeni neoteženi grafiki. Onda se usporedba provede sa svakim grafikom klase koji rezultira vektoru. Ovaj vektor se koristi kao karakteristika algoritma učenja stroja. Model se procjenjuje na održavanju strategije. Organizatori su slučajno podelili 80% (3 833 slučajeva) obuku (pruženo učesniku u obuci njihovog sustava) i testiranje postavili 20%(958 slučajeva). Nastava testiranja je rezervirana za procjenu učesničkih sustava. Tijekom procjene, naš sustav je u laboratoriji Coda rezultat podpitanja A (problem sa binarnim klasom). Sistem binarne klase postiže preciznost 0,6135, preciznost 0,5091, sjeti se 0,7170 i F mjere 0,5955. Sistem podpitanja B (multiklasni problem) u rezultatima laboratorije Coda rankira 22. Multiklasni model postiže preciznost 0,4158, preciznost 0,4055, sjeti se 0,3526 i f mjere 0,3101.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das Irony Detection System, das an SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony Detection in englischen Tweets beteiligt ist. Das System nahm an den Teilaufgaben A und B teil. In diesem Beitrag werden die Ergebnisse unseres Systems in der Entwicklung, Evaluation und Nachevaluation diskutiert. Jede Klasse im Datensatz wird als gerichtete ungewichtete Graphen dargestellt. Anschließend wird der Vergleich mit jedem Klassengraphen durchgeführt, was zu einem Vektor führt. Dieser Vektor wird als Merkmale von Machine Learning Algorithmus verwendet. Das Modell wird anhand einer Hold-on-Strategie bewertet. Die Organisatoren teilen nach dem Zufallsprinzip 80% (3,833 Instances) Trainingsset (dem Teilnehmer beim Training seines Systems zur Verfügung gestellt) und Testset 20%(958 Instances) auf. Das Testset ist reserviert, um die Leistung der Teilnehmersysteme zu bewerten. Während der Evaluation rangierte unser System 23 im Coda Lab Ergebnis des Subtasks A (Binärklassenproblem). Das binäre Klassensystem erreicht Genauigkeit 0.6135, Präzision 0.5091, Rückruf 0.7170 und F Maß 0.5955. Das Subtask B (Multi-Class Problem) System wird 22 in Coda Lab Ergebnissen eingestuft. Das Multiclass-Modell erreicht die Genauigkeit 0.4158, Präzision 0.4055, Rückruf 0.3526 und f Maß 0.3101.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem deteksi ironi yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: deteksi ironi dalam tweet Inggris. Sistem berpartisipasi dalam subtasks A dan B. Kertas ini mendiskusikan hasil dari sistem kita dalam pengembangan, evaluasi dan pos evaluasi. Setiap kelas dalam set data dipilih sebagai grafik tidak berat direksi. Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector.  Vektor ini digunakan sebagai fitur oleh algoritma pembelajaran mesin. Modelnya diteliti dalam tahan strategi. Organiser secara acak membagi 80% (3.833 kasus) set pelatihan (diberikan kepada peserta dalam pelatihan sistem mereka) dan tes set 20%(958 kasus). Set tes tersediakan untuk mengevaluasi prestasi sistem peserta. Selama evaluasi, sistem kami menandai 23 dalam hasil Coda Lab dari subtask A (masalah kelas binari). Sistem kelas binari mencapai ketepatan 0,6135, ketepatan 0,5091, ingat 0,7170 dan F ukuran 0,5955. Sistem subtask B (masalah multikelas) ditandai 22 dalam hasil Coda Lab. Model multikelas mencapai akurasi 0.4158, presi 0.4055, ingat 0.3526 dan f ukuran 0.3101.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18퀘스트3: 영어 트윗의 반어 검측에 참여하는 반어 검측 시스템을 묘사한다.이 시스템은 하위 임무 A와 B에 참여했다. 본고는 우리 시스템이 개발, 평가와 후 평가에서의 결과를 논의했다.데이터가 집중된 모든 종류는 유방향 무권도를 나타낸다.그리고 각 종류의 그림을 비교하여 벡터를 얻는다.이 벡터는 기계 학습 알고리즘에 의해 특징으로 쓰인다.이 모델은 대기 전략을 채택하여 평가한다.조직자는 랜덤으로 80%(3833건)의 교육집(시스템 교육 참여자에게 제공)과 20%(958건)의 테스트집을 분리한다.테스트 집합은 참여자 시스템의 성능을 평가하는 데 쓰인다.평가 기간 동안 우리 시스템은 서브퀘스트 A(이원류 문제)의 미파 실험실 결과에서 23위를 차지했다.2진법 시스템의 정밀도는 0.6135이고 정밀도는 0.5091이며 리콜률은 0.7170이며 F 측정치는 0.5955이다.서브퀘스트 B(여러 가지 문제) 시스템은 웨이브 실험 결과 22위에 올랐다.다중 모델의 정확도는 0.4158, 정밀도는 0.4055, 리콜율은 0.3526, f 측정치는 0.3101이다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval-2018 Taýýasy 3: Iňlisçe tweetlerde kirony tanyş sistemini tassyýar. Sistem A we B subtaskalarda bäsleşipdi. Bu kagyz sistemamyzyň gelişmegi, deňlenme we çykyşlygymyň netijesini çykýar. Maglumat setiriniň her synpy çyzylmadyk grafikler ýaly görkezildi. Sonra, vektöre ulaşan her sınıf grafiği ile karşılaştırılır. Bu vektör makine öwrenmek algoritmi bilen özellikler ýaly ullanýar Bu nusga strategiýada çykylýar. Görnişçiler muňada 80% (3.833 öňe) okuw taýýarlandyrylyp bilen böldi (sistemasy eğitimäge rugsat berildi) we 20%(958 öňe testi taýýarlandyrylyp bilen. Synagy çykyş sistemleriniň janlaýyşyny barlamak üçin gurnaldy. Ýüklemek üçin sistemimiz Coda Lab'da 23 derejesi bar. Ikinji synp sistemasy 0.6135, dogrudylyk 0.5091, 0.7170 we F ölçüsi 0.5955 diýipdir. Alt soragy B (köp klas mesele) sistemi Koda Lab netijesinde 22 düzüldir. Birnäçe klas nusgasyna 0.4158, dogrudygyny 0.4055, 0.3526 we f ölçüsi 0.3101 ýadyň.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم شناسایی آیرونی را توصیف می\u200cکند که در ماموریت نیم Eval-2018 شرکت می\u200cکند: شناسایی آیرونی در tweets انگلیسی. این کاغذ در نتایج سیستم ما در توسعه، ارزیابی و ارزیابی پست صحبت می کند. هر کلاس در مجموعه داده\u200cها به عنوان گراف\u200cهای ناوزن هدایت می\u200cشوند. سپس، مقایسه با هر گراف کلاس انجام می شود که نتیجه یک vektor است. این vektor به عنوان ویژگی توسط الگوریتم یادگیری ماشین استفاده می\u200cشود. این مدل در استراتژی ارزیابی می شود. سازمان\u200cکنندگان به صورت تصادفی 80% (3.833 instances) مجموعه آموزش (به مشرکان در آموزش سیستم خود) تقسیم کردند و مجموعه\u200cی آزمایش 20%(958 instances تقسیم کردند. مجموعه آزمایش برای ارزیابی عملکرد سیستم شرکتگران ذخیره شده است. در طول ارزیابی، سیستم ما ۲۳ درجه در آزمایشگاه کودا نتیجه زیر سوال A (مشکل کلاس دویینی) بود. سیستم کلاس دویینی دقیق 0.6135، دقیق 0.5091، 0.7170 و F اندازه 0.5955 را به یاد آورید. سیستم زیر سوال B (مشکل چند کلاس) در نتایج آزمایشگاه کودا ۲۲ درجه است. مدل چند کلاس دقیق 0.4158، دقیق 0.4055، 0.3526 و f اندازه 0.3101 را به یاد آورید.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die Ironiese beskrywing stelsel wat deel in SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Ironie beskrywing in Engels tweets. Die stelsel het deel in die subtaske A en B. Hierdie papier bespreek die resultate van ons stelsel in die ontwikkeling, evaluering en post evaluering. Elke klas in die datastel word verteenwoordig as gewigte grafieke. Dan, die vergelyking is uitgevoer met elke klas graf wat resultaat in 'n vektor. Hierdie vektor is gebruik as funksies deur masjien leer algoritme. Die model is evalueer op 'n houding van strategie. Die organiseerders het willekeurig 80% (3,833 instansies) onderwerp stel (verskaf aan die deelnader in onderwerp van hul stelsel) en toets stel 20%(958 instansies). Die toets stel is rezerveer om die prestasie van deelnaders stelsels te evalueer. In die evaluasie het ons stelsel 23 rangeer in die Coda Lab resultaat van die subvraag A (binêre klas probleem). Die binêre klas stelsel bereik presisie 0. 6135, presisie 0. 5091, reken 0. 7170 en F maat 0. 5955. Die subvraag B (multiklas probleem) stelsel is rangeer 22 in Coda Lab resultate. Die multiklas model bereik die presisie 0. 4158, presisie 0. 4055, reken 0. 3526 en f maat 0. 3101.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa uchunguzi wa Ujerumani ambao unashiriki katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Ugunduzi wa ujinga katika twiti za Kiingereza. Mfumo ulishiriki katika majukumu ya A na B. Makala hii inajadili matokeo ya mfumo wetu katika maendeleo, uchunguzi na baada ya tathmini. Kila darasa katika seti ya taarifa inawakilishwa kama picha zisizoelekezwa. Kisha, kulinganishwa na kila a in a ya grafu inayosababisha vector. Vector hii inatumika kama taswira za kujifunza algorithi ya mashine. The model is evaluated on a hold on strategy.  Waandaaji waligawanya kwa asilimia 80 (matukio 3,833) mafunzo (yaliyotolewa kwa washiriki katika mafunzo yao) na kujaribu kuanzia asilimia 20 (matukio 958). Mpango wa jaribio umewekwa ili kutathmini utendaji wa mifumo ya washiriki. Wakati wa tathmini hizo, mfumo wetu ulikuwa wa rangi 23 katika Lab ya Coda na matokeo ya kazi ya A (tatizo la darasa la binafsi). Mfumo wa darasa la mbili unafanikiwa sahihi 0.6135, sahihi 0.5091, kumbuka 0.7170 na F hatua 0.5955. Mfumo wa subira B (tatizo la darasa nyingi) umekuwa na rangi 22 katika matokeo ya Lab ya Coda. Mfano wa darasa la nyingi unafanikiwa sahihi 0.4158, sahihi 0.4055, kumbuka 0.3526 na f kipimo 0.3101.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በስምEval-2018 ስራ 3 ላይ የሚጋጠመውን የኢሮኒ ግለጽ የሚያሳውቃታል፤ በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተቶች ውስጥ የኢሮኒ ግለጽ አግኝቷል፡፡ ሲስተምሩ አ እና B በመስኮቶች ውስጥ ተጋጠመ። ይህም ፕሮግራም የስርዓታችንን ውጤቶች አካባቢ፣ ማስታወቂያ እና የፖስቲካ ማስታወቂያ ይናገራል፡፡ በዳታ ሳጥን ውስጥ ሁሉም ክፍል ሳይሰራ ቀፎች እንደሚመስል ነው፡፡ በኋላም ተሳሳይ ከሁሉም ክፍል ጋር ይደረጋል፡፡ ይህ vector ሞዴል በተመሳሳይ ስርዓት ላይ ነው፡፡ አጋራጆች 80 በመቶ (3,833 instances) አስተማሪዎች (ለሲስተማርነታቸው ተጋሪዎች) እየተከፈሉ 20 በመቶ (958 instances) ያቆመዋል፡፡ የፈተናው ስርዓት ተጋሪዎች ሲስተም እንዲያስተካክሉ የተጠበቀ ነው። During the evaluation, our system ranked 23 in the Coda Lab result of the subtask A (binary class problem).  የሁለተኛ ክፍል ስርዓት 0.6135፣ ቁጥር 0.5091፣ 0.7170 እና F ልክ 0.5955 እንዲያገኝ ነው። ጥያቄው B (የብዙ-ደረጃ ችግር) ስርዓት በኮዳ ላብ ውጤቶች 22 ነው፡፡ የብዙ ክፍል ሞዴል እውነተኛውን 0.4158፣ ቁጥር 0.4055፣ 0.3526 እና f መስፈሪያ 0.3101 እንዲያገኝ ነው።', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin e zbulimit të ironisë që merr pjesë në SemEval-2018 Task 3: zbulimi i ironisë në tweetet angleze. Sistemi mori pjesë në nënpyetjet A dhe B. Ky dokument diskuton rezultatet e sistemit tonë në zhvillimin, vlerësimin dhe vlerësimin pas. Çdo klasë në grupin e të dhënave përfaqësohet si grafikë të drejtuar pa peshë. Pastaj, krahasimi bëhet me çdo grafik klase që rezulton në një vektor. Ky vektor përdoret si karakteristika nga algoritmi i mësimit të makinave. Modeli vlerësohet në një pritje në strategji. Organizatorët ndanë rastësisht 80% (3,833 raste) grupin e trajnimit (të ofruar pjesëmarrësit në trajnimin e sistemit të tyre) dhe testimet vendosën 20% (958 raste). Grupi i testit është rezervuar për të vlerësuar performancën e sistemeve të pjesëmarrësve. Gjatë vlerësimit, sistemi ynë renditi 23 në rezultatin e Coda Lab të nënpyetjes A. Sistemi binar i klasës arrin saktësinë 0.6135, saktësinë 0.5091, tërheq 0.7170 dhe matjen F 0.5955. Sistemi i nënpyetjes B (problem shumë klasash) është renditur 22 në rezultatet e Coda Lab. Modeli multiklasik arrin saktësinë 0.4158, saktësinë 0.4055, tërheq 0.3526 dhe f masa 0.3101.', 'hy': "Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է Իրոնիայի հայտնաբերման համակարգը, որը մասնակցում է ՍեմԵվալ 2018-ի 3-րդ հանձնարարության' Իրոնիայի հայտնաբերման անգլերեն թվիթերում: Այս աշխատանքը քննարկում է մեր համակարգի արդյունքները զարգացման, գնահատման և հետգնահատման մեջ: Տեղեկատվական համակարգի յուրաքանչյուր դասարան ներկայացված է որպես ուղղված անկշռված գրաֆիկներ: Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector.  Այս վեկտորը օգտագործվում է որպես առանձնահատկություններ մեքենային սովորելու ալգորիթմի միջոցով: Մոդելը գնահատվում է սպասելով ռազմավարության վրա: Տեղադրողները պատահականորեն բաժանեցին 80 տոկոսը (3.833 օրինակ) ուսումնասիրության համակարգը (որը տրամադրվում է իրենց համակարգի ուսումնասիրության մասնակիցներին) և փորձարկումները 20 տոկոսը (958 օրինակ): Տեստի համակարգը պահպանված է մասնակիցների համակարգերի արդյունավետության գնահատման համար: Արժեքի ընթացքում մեր համակարգը 23-րդ դասակարգված էր Կոդա լաբորատորիայի արդյունքում A-ի ենթահարցի (երկու դասարանի խնդիր) արդյունքում: Երկնական դասարանի համակարգը հասնում է ճշգրտության 0.6135, ճշգրտության 0.5091, վերադարձնում է 0.7170 և F չափով 0.59 55: The subtask B (multi-class problem) system is ranked 22 in Coda Lab results.  Բազմադասական մոդելը հասնում է 0.4158 ճշգրտության, 0.4055 ճշգրտության, 0.3526 և f չափով 0.3101:", 'az': "Bu kağıt yarım Eval-2018 Görevi 3: İngilizə tweetlərdə Ironi keşfetməsi sistemini təsdiq edir. Sistem A və B subtasklarına katıldı. Bu kağıt sistemimizin tədbirləşdirilməsi, değerlendirməsi və post değerlendirməsi üçün mübahisə edir. Datum qutusundakı hər dəstə tərəfindən çəkilməmiş grafiklər kimi göstərildir. Sonra, hər sınıf grafı ilə qarşılaşdırılır ki, bir vektor sonucu verir. Bu vektor mašin öyrənməsi algoritmi vasitəsilə qullanılır. Model müəyyən bir stratejidə değerlənir. Organizatorlar təhsil olaraq 80% (3.833 instans) təhsil quruluşu (sistemlərini təhsil etmək üçün müəyyən edilənə) və 20%(958 instans təhsil qurulmuşlar. İşləyici sistemlərin performansını değerləşdirmək üçün sınama qurulmuşdur. Qıymet sırasında, sistemimiz Coda Lab'da A subtask nəticəsində 23 səf çəkdi. İkilik sınıf sistemi 0.6135, precision 0.5091, 0.7170 və F ölçüsü 0.5955 ola bilər. Üstsual B (çoxlu sınıf problemi) sistemi Coda Lab sonuçlarında 22 səf çəkilir. Multi-sınıf modeli 0.4158, precision 0.4055, 0.3526 və f ölçüsi 0.3101'i yada salır.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém detekce ironie, který se podílí na SemEval-2018 Task 3: Detekce ironie v anglických tweetech. Systém se podílel na dílčích úkolech A a B. Tento článek diskutuje výsledky našeho systému při vývoji, hodnocení a následném hodnocení. Každá třída v datové sadě je reprezentována jako směrované nevážené grafy. Poté je provedeno srovnání s každým grafem třídy, který vytvoří vektor. Tento vektor je používán jako vlastnosti algoritmu strojového učení. Model je hodnocen na základě hold on strategie. Organizátoři náhodně rozdělili 80% (3,833 instance), tréninkovou sadu (poskytnutou účastníkovi tréninku jejich systému) a testovací sadu 20%(958 instance). Testovací sada je vyhrazena pro hodnocení výkonnosti systémů účastníků. Během hodnocení se náš systém zařadil 23 ve výsledku Coda Lab podúkolu A (problém binární třídy). Systém binární třídy dosahuje přesnosti 0,6135, přesnosti 0,5091, odvolání 0,7170 a F měření 0,5955. Systém podúkolu B (multi-class problem) je hodnocen 22 ve výsledcích Coda Lab. Vícetřídíkový model dosahuje přesnosti 0.4158, přesnosti 0.4055, odvolání 0.3526 a f měření 0.3101.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ব্যাখ্যা করেছে যে আইরোনি আবিষ্কার ব্যবস্থা যা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে: ইংরেজী টুইটে আইরোনি সন্ধ এই প্রবন্ধটি আমাদের সিস্টেম উন্নয়ন, মূল্যায়ন এবং পোস্ট মূল্যের ফলাফল নিয়ে আলোচনা করেছে। ডাটাসেটের প্রত্যেক শ্রেণীকে নির্দেশিত অগ্রাফ হিসেবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়। Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector.  মেশিন শিক্ষা অ্যালগরিদমের বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে এই ভেক্টর ব্যবহার করা হয়। মডেলটি কৌশলের উপর মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে। প্রশিক্ষণের সেট (তাদের সিস্টেমে অংশগ্রহণকারীদের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে) এবং পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে ২০% (৯৫৮ অনুষ্ঠান)। অংশগ্রহণকারী সিস্টেমের প্রভাব মূল্যায়নের জন্য পরীক্ষা সেট সংরক্ষণ করা হয়েছে। মূল্যায়নের সময় আমাদের সিস্টেম কোডা ল্যাবের ২৩ টি সাবক্ষেত্র A (বাইনারি ক্লাসের সমস্যা)। বাইনারি শ্রেণীর সিস্টেম 0. 6135, ঠিক 0. 5091, ০. 7170 এবং F মাপ 0. 5955 স্মরণ করুন। সাবকাজ B (বহুশ্রেণীর সমস্যা) সিস্টেম কোডা ল্যাবের ফলাফলে ২২ টি রান্না করা হয়েছে। মাল্টিক্লাসের মডেলটি সঠিকভাবে পৌঁছে যায় 0. 4158, সমান 0. 4055, ০.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema de detecció d'ironia que participa en SemEval-2018 tasca 3: detecció d'ironia en tweets anglesos. El sistema va participar en les subtanya A i B. Aquest paper discute els resultats del nostre sistema en el desenvolupament, l'evaluació i la postevaluació. Cada classe del conjunt de dades està representada com gràfics directs sense pes. Llavors, la comparació es fa amb cada gràfic de classe que resulta en un vector. Aquest vector s'utilitza com a característiques per algoritme d'aprenentatge automàtic. El model es valora durant una espera de l'estratègia. The organizers randomly split 80% (3,833 instances) training set (provided to the participant in training their system) and testing set 20%(958 instances).  El conjunt d'exàmens està reservat per avaluar el rendiment dels sistemes de participants. Durant l'evaluació, el nostre sistema va classificar-se en 23 resultats del Coda Lab de la subterrània A (problema de classe binaria). El sistema de classe binaria aconsegueix la precisió 0,6135, la precisió 0,5091, recorda 0,7170 i F mesura 0,5955. El sistema de subterrània B (problema de múltiples classes) es classe 22 als resultats del Coda Lab. El model multiclasse aconsegueix la precisió 0,4158, la precisió 0,4055, recorda 0,3526 i f mesura 0,3101.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem detektiva Ironija koji sudjeluje u zadatku 3. iz polovice 2018: detektiva Ironija na engleskim tweetima. Sistem je sudjelovao u podstavama A i B. Ovaj papir razgovara o rezultatima našeg sistema u razvoju, procjenu i post procjenu. Svaka klasa u setu podataka predstavlja se kao navedeni neoteženi grafiki. Onda se usporedba provede sa svakim grafikom klase koji rezultira vektoru. Ovaj vektor se koristi kao karakteristika algoritma za učenje mašine. Model se procjenjuje na održavanju strategije. Organizatori su slučajno podijelili obuku 80% (3 833 slučajeva), a testiranje postavilo 20%(958 slučajeva. Nastava testiranja je rezervirana kako bi procenila učinkovitost sustava sudionika. Tokom procjene, naš sistem je u laboratoriji Coda rezultat podpitanja A (problem sa binarnim klasom). Sistem binarne klase postiže preciznost 0,6135, preciznost 0,5091, sjeti se 0,7170 i F mjere 0,5955. Sistem podpitanja B (multiklasični problem) je u rezultatima Coda Lab-a u redovima 22. Multiklasni model postiže preciznost 0,4158, preciznost 0,4055, sjeti se 0,3526 i f mjere 0,3101.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse irooni tuvastamise süsteemi, mis osaleb SemEval-2018 ülesandes 3: irooni tuvastamine inglise säutsudes. Süsteem osales alaülesannetes A ja B. Käesolevas artiklis käsitletakse meie süsteemi tulemusi arendamisel, hindamisel ja järelhindamisel. Andmekogumi iga klass on esitatud suunatud kaalumata graafikutena. Seejärel tehakse võrdlus iga klassigraafikuga, mille tulemuseks on vektor. Seda vektorit kasutatakse masinõppe algoritmi funktsioonidena. Mudelit hinnatakse strateegia põhjal. Korraldajad jagasid juhuslikult 80% (3 833 eksemplari) koolituskomplekti (antud osalejale oma süsteemi koolitamisel) ja testiskomplekti 20% (958 eksemplari). Katsekomplekt on reserveeritud osalejate süsteemide jõudluse hindamiseks. Hindamise käigus oli meie süsteem Coda Labi tulemuses 23. kohal alamülesande A (binaarklassi probleem). Binaarklassi süsteem saavutab täpsuse 0,6135, täpsuse 0,5091, tagasikutsumise 0,7170 ja F mõõdu 0,5955. Alaülesanne B (mitmeklassiline probleem) süsteem on Coda Lab tulemustes 22. kohal. Mitmeklassiline mudel saavutab täpsuse 0,4158, täpsuse 0,4055, tagasikutsumise 0,3526 ja f mõõtme 0,3101.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval-2018 Task 3: Irony detection in English tweets -ohjelmaan osallistuvaa Irony detection -järjestelmää. Järjestelmä osallistui alatehtäviin A ja B. Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään järjestelmämme tuloksia kehityksessä, arvioinnissa ja jälkiarvioinnissa. Jokainen aineiston luokka on esitetty suunnattuina punnittomina kaavioina. Tämän jälkeen vertailu suoritetaan kunkin luokan kaavion kanssa, joka johtaa vektoriin. Tätä vektoria käytetään ominaisuuksina koneoppimisen algoritmissa. Mallia arvioidaan strategiasta riippuen. Järjestäjät jakavat satunnaisesti 80% (3 833 tapausta) koulutusjoukon (joka annetaan osallistujalle heidän järjestelmänsä kouluttamisessa) ja testausjoukon 20% (958 tapausta). Testisetti on varattu osallistujien järjestelmien suorituskyvyn arviointiin. Arvioinnin aikana järjestelmämme sijoittui 23 Coda Labin tulokseen alatehtävästä A (binaariluokan ongelma). Binääriluokan järjestelmä saavuttaa tarkkuuden 0,6135, tarkkuuden 0,5091, takaisinkutsun 0,7170 ja F-mitta 0,5955. Alatehtävä B (multi-class problem) -järjestelmä on sijalla 22 Coda Lab -tuloksissa. Moniluokkainen malli saavuttaa tarkkuuden 0,4158, tarkkuuden 0,4055, takaisinkutsun 0,3526 ja f-mitta 0,3101.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem za odkrivanje ironije, ki sodeluje v nalogi 3 SemEval-2018: Odkrivanje ironije v angleških tweetih. Sistem je sodeloval pri podnalogah A in B. V prispevku so obravnavani rezultati našega sistema pri razvoju, vrednotenju in naknadnem vrednotenju. Vsak razred v naboru podatkov je predstavljen kot usmerjeni neotehtani grafi. Nato se izvede primerjava z vsakim grafom razredov, ki ima za rezultat vektor. Ta vektor se uporablja kot značilnosti algoritma strojnega učenja. Model se ocenjuje na podlagi strategije. Organizatorji so naključno razdelili 80% (3.833 primerov) nabor usposabljanja (zagotovljen udeležencu pri usposabljanju njegovega sistema) in 20% (958 primerov). Test set je rezerviran za oceno učinkovitosti sistemov udeležencev. Med ocenjevanjem je naš sistem uvrstil 23. mesto v Coda Lab rezultat podopravila A (problem binarnega razreda). Sistem binarnih razredov dosega natančnost 0,6135, natančnost 0,5091, odpoklic 0,7170 in F merilo 0,5955. Sistem podopravila B (multi-class problem) je uvrščen na 22. mesto v rezultatih Coda Lab. Model z več razredi dosega natančnost 0,4158, natančnost 0,4055, odpoklic 0,3526 in meritev f 0,3101.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗaɗa tsarin Ciron da ke ƙara cikin aikin Semeval-2018: The system participated in the subtasks A and B. This paper discusses the results of our system in the development, evaluation and post evaluation.  Kowace kure cikin tsarin database na nuna kamar an shiryar da graphogi wanda ba'a yi sauna ba. Sa'an nan, an sami misalin shi da duk grafi wanda yake ƙara wata hanya. Wannan mai shiryarwa ke amfani da kamar misfeature na amfani da algoritm mai sanar da mashine. Ana ƙaddara misalin a kan wani mai riƙo. Mai shirin da aka raba shi, a ranar 80% (da shiryoyin ayuka 3,833) na daidaita shi (da aka bai wa shirin zama na tsarin tsarin su) kuma aka jarraba shi, ana daidaita 20% (da shiryoyin ayuka 958). An adana tsarin jarraba don a ƙayyade aikin mãsu shirin ayuka. Duran evaluation, na'asarmu ta ranar 23 a cikin Lab na Coda na ƙara matsalar sub-aikin A (matabbatar daraja biyu). Sistemi na biyu na sami tsari 0.6135, na ƙayyade 0.50 91, ka ambaci 0.7170 da F gwargwadon 0.5955. An ranar da ƙantar aikin B (matsalar-cikin-multi) na'ura 22 cikin matsalan Lab. Motdalin mulki ya sami tsarin 0.4158, na ƙayyade 0.4055, ka tuna 0.3 526 da f ma'aunin 0.31 01.", 'jv': 'Ngerti iki rambarang panjenengan Sistem Panjenengan Siji sing nyebatasan nang semebal-2008 task 3: Panjenengan tanggal urip lan tuwit inglis. Sistem sing ngejaraké ning tarjamahan A lan B. Perintah iki dadi kamulatan tanggal sistem awak dhéwé ning njujêm, jewisan karo kalih nyong. All Where am I vector Model kuwi ngejaraké ngerasakno dadi. Jejaring Tengeng wis dipoleh nggawe kanggo kuwi nggawe sistem sing beraksi perusahaan Anyone Sistem soko binêr Ngubah apa-suang B (bot multi-klas) sistem wis ditambah 22 nang koda Lab dadi. Display', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכת זיהוי אירוניה שמשתתפת בסימוול-2018 משימה 3: זיהוי אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים. המערכת השתתפה בשאלות A ו-B. העבודה הזאת מדברת על תוצאות המערכת שלנו בפיתוח, הערכה ואחרי הערכה. כל כיתה במערכת הנתונים מייצגת כגרפים לא משובחים. ואז, השוואה נעשה עם כל גרף כיתה שמוציא בוקטור. ווקטור זה משתמש כתכונות על ידי אלגוריתם ללמוד מכונות. המודל מוערך בהמתנה באסטרטגיה. המארגנים חלקו באופן אקראי 80% (3,833 מקרים) קבוצת אימונים (אספקו לשתתף באימון המערכת שלהם) ובדיקות קבעו 20% (958 מקרים). קבוצת הבדיקות מושמרת כדי להעריך את ההפעה של מערכות המשתתפים. במהלך הערכה, המערכת שלנו דיווחה 23 בתוצאה מעבדת קודה של התת-שאלה A (בעיה בכיתה בינרית). מערכת הכיתה הבינרית משיגה מדויקה 0.6135, מדויקה 0.5091, חזרה 0.7170 ו-F מדויקה 0.5955. The subtask B (multi-class problem) system is ranked 22 in Coda Lab results.  הדוגמא המרבית השיגה מדויקת 0.4158, מדויקת 0.4055, זוכרת 0.3526 ו-f ממדה 0.3101.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval-2018 ལས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བ་ཐུག་མའི་སྙན་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རིམ་པ་དེ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མ་ལག་གིས་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་A དང་B(subtasks)ནང་དུ་མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པ་ཡིན། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་གནད་སྤེལ་ལས་འག སྡེར་གྲངས་ཚང་ནང་གི་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་མེད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཙམ་མཚོན་གྱི་ཡོད། དེ་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱས་ན། དབྱེ་རིས་རེར་སོ་སོའི་ཚད་རྩིས་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཁྲིལ་ཡོད། སྒུལ་ཆས་འདི་ལག་ལེན་གྱིས་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྩིས་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་པ་ལས་སྤྱོད་རོགས། མིག་ཆས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྣེ་ཐོག་མགོ་རྩིས་བ་ཞིབ་འཇོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དབྱེ་སྒྲིག ཞིབ་འཆར་གཞུང་ནི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་མ་ལག་གི་གྲུབ་སྐྱོར་ཚད་ལྟར་བཞག་ཡོད། དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་དབྱེ་རིམ་A(གཉིས་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོགས་)རྣམས གཉིས་ཆ་གླིང་སྡོམ་གྱི་མ་ལག་དུ་ཚད་0.6135 ། མཐོ་ཚད་0.5091 བསྡད་ཡོད། 0.7170་དང་། F་ཚད་0.5955 བསྡད་ཡོད། ས subtask B (multi-class problem)མ་ལག་གིས་Coda Lab འི་གནད་སྡུད་དེ་༢་རིང་ཡོད། སྣ་ཚོགས་གྲྭར་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་དེ་དག་ཚད་0.4158 དང་། དོན་ཐང་ཚད་0.4055 ཡིན། 0.3526་དང་f་ཚད་0.3101་ལ་བསྡུར་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Lancaster at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'ar': 'لانكستر في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: التحقيق في الميزات الأيونية في التغريدات الإنجليزية', 'es': 'Lancaster en SemEval-2018 Tarea 3: Investigación de características irónicas en tuits en inglés', 'fr': 'Lancaster au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 3\xa0: Enquêter sur les fonctionnalités ironiques dans les tweets anglais', 'pt': 'Lancaster no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Investigando características irônicas em tweets em inglês', 'ja': 'Lancaster at SemEval -2018タスク3 ：英語ツイートにおけるアイロニックな機能の調査', 'zh': '兰开斯特在SemEval-2018务3:案英语推文讽刺性特征', 'ru': 'Ланкастер на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Изучение иронических особенностей в твитах на английском языке', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर लैंकेस्टर: अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबनापूर्ण विशेषताओं की जांच', 'ga': 'Lancaster ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Ag Iniúchadh ar Ghnéithe Iarónacha i dTvuíteanna Béarla', 'ka': 'ლანკასტერი SemEval-2018 დავალება 3: ინტერვისტირება ინგლისური ტუქტურების ინგლისური Tweets-ში', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Διερεύνηση ειρωνικών χαρακτηριστικών στα Αγγλικά Τουίτερ', 'hu': 'Lancaster a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Ironikus jellemzők vizsgálata angol tweetekben', 'it': 'Lancaster al SemEval-2018 Task 3: Indagine sulle caratteristiche ironiche nei tweet inglesi', 'lt': '„Lancaster“ programos „SemEval-2018“ 3 užduotis: ironinių savybių tyrimas anglų dvietais', 'mk': 'Ланкастер на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Истражување на иронички карактеристики на англиски твитови', 'kk': 'Ланкастер жарым- 2018 тапсырмасы 3: Ироникалық қасиеттерді ағылшын Tweets тізімінде зерттеу', 'ms': 'Lancaster di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Menyelidiki Features Ironic dalam Tweets Inggeris', 'mt': 'Lancaster f’SemEval-2018 Task 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3 ലാന്\u200dകാസ്റ്റര്\u200d: ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ട്വീറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ഇംഗ', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3:', 'no': 'Lancaster på semiEval-2018 Oppgåve 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'pl': 'Lancaster w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Badanie ironicznych cech w angielskich tweetach', 'ro': 'Lancaster la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Investigarea caracteristicilor ironice în tweeturile engleze', 'sr': 'Lancaster na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: istraživanje ironskih karakteristika na engleskim tweetima', 'si': 'ලන්කාන්ස්ටර් සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 3: ඉංග්\u200dරීස් ට්විට් වල අයිරෝනික විශේෂතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න', 'so': 'Shaqaalaha 3: Qaybta jardiinada qoraalka ee luuqada Ingiriiska ku baaraandegista', 'sv': 'Lancaster på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Undersöka ironiska funktioner i engelska tweets', 'ta': 'Lancaster at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'ur': 'لنکسٹر سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 3: انگلیسی ٹویٹ میں ایرونیک فوکتور تحقیق کرنے والا ہے', 'uz': '3 Vazifani SemEval- 2018- yildagi Lancaster: Inglizcha Twitterlarda Ironcha moslamalarini qidirish', 'vi': 'Lancaster ở SemaEvl-thẩm 8 Task 3: Điều tra tính cục cười bằng Tweet tiếng Anh', 'bg': 'Ланкастър в Задача 3: Изследване на ироничните особености в английски Туитс', 'nl': 'Lancaster bij SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Ironische kenmerken onderzoeken in Engelse Tweets', 'hr': 'Lancaster na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: istraživanje ironskih karakteristika na engleskim tweetima', 'id': 'Lancaster di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Menyelidiki Features Ironic dalam Tweets Inggris', 'da': 'Lancaster på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Undersøgelse af ironiske funktioner i engelske tweets', 'de': 'Lancaster bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Untersuchung ironischer Merkmale in englischen Tweets', 'sw': 'Makala katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Kuchunguza Tamko za Kijerumani katika twiti za Kiingereza', 'ko': '란체스터가SemEval-18 임무3: 영어 트윗에서의 반풍적 특징 조사', 'fa': 'لانکستر در تابع سوم اول-۲۰۰۸: تحقیق ویژه\u200cهای ایرونیک در تویت انگلیسی', 'tr': 'Lancaster at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'af': 'Lancaster by SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'sq': 'Lancaster në SemEval-2018 Task 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'am': 'የስምEval-2018 ስራ 3: በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች ላይ የኢሮኒክ ምርጫዎችን በመጠየቅ', 'bn': 'Lancaster at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'hy': 'Լանկաստերը, 2018 թվականի "Սեմեվալ"-ի 3. հանձնարարությունը. Անգլերենի թվիթերի երկրագույն հատկանիշների հետազոտությունը', 'bs': 'Lancaster na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: istraživanje ironskih karakteristika na engleskim tweetima', 'az': 'Lancaster at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'cs': 'Lancaster na SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Zkoumání ironických vlastností v anglických tweetech', 'et': 'Lancaster SemEval-2018 ülesandel 3: irooniliste omaduste uurimine inglise keeles Tweets', 'fi': 'Lancaster SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Ironisten ominaisuuksien tutkiminen englanniksi Tweets', 'ca': 'Lancaster a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'jv': 'Show a time zone', 'sk': 'Lancaster na SemEval-2018 naloga 3: Raziskovanje ironičnih značilnosti v angleščini Tweets', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase', 'he': 'Lancaster at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets', 'bo': 'Lancaster at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Investigating Ironic Features in English Tweets'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system we submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 3. The aim of the system is to distinguish between irony and non-irony in English tweets. We create a targeted feature set and analyse how different features are useful in the task of irony detection, achieving an F1-score of 0.5914. The analysis of individual features provides insight that may be useful in future attempts at detecting irony in tweets.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام الذي قدمناه إلى SemEval-2018 Task 3. الهدف من النظام هو التمييز بين السخرية وعدم السخرية في التغريدات الإنجليزية. نقوم بإنشاء مجموعة ميزات مستهدفة ونحلل مدى فائدة الميزات المختلفة في مهمة الكشف عن المفارقة ، وتحقيق درجة F1 تبلغ 0.5914. يوفر تحليل الميزات الفردية نظرة ثاقبة قد تكون مفيدة في المحاولات المستقبلية لاكتشاف السخرية في التغريدات.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema que submetemos à Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2018. O objetivo do sistema é distinguir entre ironia e não ironia em tweets em inglês. Criamos um conjunto de recursos direcionado e analisamos como os diferentes recursos são úteis na tarefa de detecção de ironia, alcançando uma pontuação F1 de 0,5914. A análise de recursos individuais fornece insights que podem ser úteis em futuras tentativas de detectar ironia em tweets.', 'es': 'Este documento describe el sistema que enviamos a la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018. El objetivo del sistema es distinguir entre ironía y no ironía en los tuits en inglés. Creamos un conjunto de funciones específicas y analizamos cómo las diferentes funciones son útiles en la tarea de detección de ironía, logrando una puntuación de F1 de 0.5914. El análisis de las características individuales proporciona información que puede ser útil en futuros intentos de detectar ironía en los tuits.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système que nous avons soumis à SemeVal-2018 Task 3. Le but du système est de faire la distinction entre ironie et non-ironie dans les tweets en anglais. Nous créons un ensemble de fonctionnalités ciblées et analysons l'utilité des différentes fonctionnalités dans la tâche de détection de l'ironie, en obtenant un score F1 de 0,5914. L'analyse des caractéristiques individuelles fournit des informations qui pourraient être utiles lors de futures tentatives de détection de l'ironie dans les tweets.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018 Task 3に提出したシステムについて説明する。このシステムの目的は、英語のツイートで皮肉と非皮肉を区別することである。ターゲットを絞ったフィーチャーセットを作成し、さまざまなフィーチャーが皮肉検出のタスクでどのように有用かを分析し、0.5914のF 1スコアを達成します。個々の機能の分析は、ツイートの皮肉を検出する将来の試みに役立つ可能性のある洞察を提供します。', 'zh': '本文引SemEval-2018 Task 3系统。 统者,所以别英语推文刺非刺也。 创一的特征集,并析了不同的有用于讽刺性,得到了0.5914的F1分数。 供以一见,或助将来检测推文之刺。', 'ru': 'В этом документе описывается система, которую мы представили SemEval-2018 Task 3. Цель системы - различать иронию и неиронию в английских твитах. Мы создаем целевой набор признаков и анализируем, насколько различные признаки полезны в задаче обнаружения иронии, достигая F1-оценки 0,5914. Анализ отдельных особенностей дает понимание, которое может быть полезно в будущих попытках обнаружения иронии в твитах.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर उस प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है जिसे हमने SemEval-2018 टास्क 3 में प्रस्तुत किया था। सिस्टम का उद्देश्य अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना और गैर-विडंबना के बीच अंतर करना है। हम एक लक्षित सुविधा सेट बनाते हैं और विश्लेषण करते हैं कि विडंबना का पता लगाने के कार्य में विभिन्न विशेषताएं कैसे उपयोगी हैं, 0.5914 का एफ 1-स्कोर प्राप्त करना। व्यक्तिगत सुविधाओं का विश्लेषण अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करता है जो ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाने के भविष्य के प्रयासों में उपयोगी हो सकता है।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a chuireamar faoi bhráid SemEval-2018 Tasc 3. Is é aidhm an chórais idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir íoróin agus neamh-íoróin i dtvuíteanna Béarla. Cruthaímid tacar gné spriocdhírithe agus déanaimid anailís ar an gcaoi a bhfuil gnéithe éagsúla úsáideach sa tasc chun íoróin a bhrath, ag baint amach scór F1 de 0.5914. Soláthraíonn an anailís ar ghnéithe aonair léargas a d’fhéadfadh a bheith úsáideach in iarrachtaí sa todhchaí íoróin a bhrath i dtvuíteanna.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που υποβάλαμε στην εργασία 3. Στόχος του συστήματος είναι η διάκριση μεταξύ ειρωνείας και μη ειρωνείας στα αγγλικά tweets. Δημιουργούμε ένα στοχευμένο σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών και αναλύουμε πώς τα διαφορετικά χαρακτηριστικά είναι χρήσιμα στο έργο της ανίχνευσης ειρωνείας, επιτυγχάνοντας ένα σκορ F1 0.5914. Η ανάλυση των επιμέρους χαρακτηριστικών παρέχει πληροφορίες που μπορεί να είναι χρήσιμες σε μελλοντικές προσπάθειες ανίχνευσης ειρωνείας στα tweets.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány ismerteti a SemEval-2018 feladat 3. részére benyújtott rendszert. A rendszer célja, hogy különbséget tegyen az irónia és a nem irónia között angol tweetekben. Célzott funkciókészletet hozunk létre, és elemezzük, hogy a különböző funkciók milyen hasznosak az irónia felismerésében, elérve az F1 pontszámot 0,5914. Az egyes funkciók elemzése olyan betekintést nyújt, amely hasznos lehet a tweetek iróniájának felismerésére irányuló jövőbeli kísérletekben.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერს სისტემა, რომელიც ჩვენ SemEval-2018 დავაწერეთ სამუშაო სამუშაო. სისტემის მისამართი არის იპონიის და არ იპონიის განსხვავება ინგლისური tweets-ში. ჩვენ დავაქმნით მისაღებული ფუნქცია და ანალიზაცით თუ როგორ განსხვავებული ფუნქციები გამოიყენებულია იპონიის განახლების მომუშაობაში, როგორც 0.5914-ის F1-score. ინდიველური განსაზღვრებების ანალიზაცია შეიძლება იყენება, რომელიც შეიძლება იყენება მომავალური მოცდილობისთვის იპონიის განსაზღვრებისთვის.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema che abbiamo presentato a SemEval-2018 Task 3. Lo scopo del sistema è quello di distinguere tra ironia e non ironia nei tweet inglesi. Creiamo un set di funzionalità mirato e analizziamo come le diverse funzionalità siano utili nel compito di rilevamento dell'ironia, ottenendo un punteggio F1 di 0,5914. L'analisi delle singole funzionalità fornisce informazioni utili nei futuri tentativi di rilevare l'ironia nei tweet.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma sistema, kurią pateikėme „SemEval-2018“ 3 uždaviniui. Sistemos tikslas – atskirti ironiją ir ne ironiją anglų tweetuose. Kuriame tikslinį požymių rinkinį ir analizuojame, kaip skirtingi požymiai yra naudingi ironijos nustatymo uždaviniui, siekiant F1 taško 0,5914. Atskirų savybių analizė suteikia supratimą, kuris gali būti naudingas ateityje bandant nustatyti ironiją tweetuose.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біз 30- 2018 тапсырмасына жіберген жүйені таңдайды. Жүйеңіздің мақсаты - ағылшын тійтерінде irony мен irony емес арасында айыру. Біз мақсатты мүмкіндіктерді құрып, айрымды анықтау тапсырмасында қанша түрлі мүмкіндіктер пайдалы екенін анықтап, F1- нөмірі 0, 5914 деп жеткізеді. Жеке мүмкіндіктердің анализиясы таңдау үшін келесідегі тәртіптерді табу әрекетінде пайдалы болуы мүмкін.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува системот кој го поднесовме на SemEval-2018 задача 3. Целта на системот е да се разликува меѓу иронијата и неиронијата на англиските твитови. Ние создаваме целосен сет карактеристики и анализираме како различни карактеристики се корисни во задачата на иронија детекција, постигнувајќи резултат F1 од 0,5914. Анализата на индивидуалните карактеристики обезбедува сфаќање кое може да биде корисно во идните обиди за откривање иронија на твитовите.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang kami hantar ke SemEval-2018 Tugas 3. Tujuan sistem adalah untuk membezakan antara ironi dan tidak ironi dalam tweet Inggeris. Kami mencipta set fitur sasaran dan menganalisis bagaimana fitur berbeza berguna dalam tugas pengesan ironi, mencapai skor F1 0.5914. Analisis ciri-ciri individu memberikan pandangan yang mungkin berguna dalam percubaan masa depan untuk mengesan ironi dalam tweet.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3 കൊടുത്ത സിസ്റ്റം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പരിഹസിക്കുന്നതും തമ്മില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നതാണ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യമുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുകയും പരിശോധിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. പരിഹസിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ജോലിയില്\u200d എത്ര ഉപയോഗ വ്യക്തിപരമായ വ്യക്തിത്വങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണം കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഭാവിയിലെ പരിഹാസപ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിഹസിക്കുന്നതിന് അതി', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema li ppreżentajna lis-SemEval-2018 Task 3. L-għan tas-sistema huwa li tiddistingwi bejn l-ironja u n-nonironja fit-tweets Ingliż. Aħna nħolqu sett ta’ karatteristiċi mmirati u ninalwaw kif karatteristiċi differenti huma utli fil-kompitu ta’ rilevament tal-ironija, u nilħqu punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.5914. L-analiżi tal-karatteristiċi individwali tipprovdi għarfien li jista’ jkun utli f’tentattivi futuri biex tinstab ironja fit-tweets.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2018 Task 3-д өгсөн системийг тайлбарладаг. Энэ системийн зорилго нь Англи хэлний tweets дээр гайхамшигтай, гайхамшигтай байдлыг ялгах юм. Бид зориулсан өөрчлөлтийг бүтээж, шинжилгээ үзүүлэхэд хэрхэн өөр өөрчлөлтийг ашигладаг вэ? F1-тоо 0.5914 гарч байна. Хүн бүрийн тодорхойлолтуудын шинжилгээ нь ирээдүйн tweets дээр гайхамшигтай байдлыг олох хичээлд ашигтай ойлголт гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vi sendte til semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3. Målet på systemet er å forskjelle mellom irony og ikkje-irony i engelske tweeter. Vi oppretter eit målte funksjonssett og analyserer korleis ulike funksjonar er nyttig i oppgåva av ironisk oppdaging, som gjer ein F1- score av 0,5914. Analysen av individuelle funksjonar gjev innsikt som kan vera nyttig i framtidige forsøk på å oppdaga irony i tweeter.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system, który przesłaliśmy do SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3. Celem systemu jest rozróżnienie ironii od nieironii w angielskich tweetach. Tworzymy ukierunkowany zestaw funkcji i analizujemy, w jaki sposób różne funkcje są przydatne w zadaniu wykrywania ironii, osiągając wynik F1 0,5914. Analiza poszczególnych cech dostarcza wglądu, który może być przydatny w przyszłych próbach wykrycia ironii w tweetach.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul pe care l-am prezentat la SemEval-2018 Task 3. Scopul sistemului este de a distinge între ironie și non-ironie în tweeturile în limba engleză. Creăm un set de caracteristici specifice și analizăm modul în care diferitele caracteristici sunt utile în sarcina detectării ironiei, obținând un scor F1 de 0,5914. Analiza caracteristicilor individuale oferă o perspectivă care poate fi utilă în încercările viitoare de detectare a ironiei în tweet-uri.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem koji smo predali zadatku 3. Cilj sistema je različiti ironiju i ne ironiju na engleskim tweetima. Napravili smo ciljnu osobinu i analizirali kako su različite karakteristike korisne u zadatku ironičkog otkrića, ostvarili F1-rezultat od 0,5914. Analiza pojedinačnih karakteristika pruža uvid koji može biti korisno u budućim pokušajima otkrivanja ironija u tweetima.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka aan u soo dhiibnay SemEval-2018 shaqo 3. Ujeedada nidaamka waa in uu kala soocaa xijooyin iyo mid aan ku filnayn Twitteetka Ingiriiska. Waxaynu sameynaa heer la hago oo baaraynaa sidoo kale waxyaabo kala duduwan oo ay u faa’iido ku leeyihiin goobta la garto irony, dhamaadka kooxda F1 ee 0.5914. Baaritaanka qeybaha gaarka ah waxaa ka muuqata waxyaabaha ay faa’iido u noqon karaan wakhtiga mustaqbalka jacaylka ee tweetka.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපි සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩ 3ට දාලා තියෙන පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා. පද්ධතියේ අලක්ෂණය තමයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ටුයිට් වල ඉන්න අයිරෝනිය සහ අයිරෝනිය අතර වෙනස් කරන්න. අපි ඉලක්කුණු විශේෂයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා සහ විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද වෙනස් විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ අයිරෝනි ප ප්\u200dරතිකෘති විශේෂණයේ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙනවා ඒක අනාගතයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න පුළුවන් වි', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver det system vi skickade in till SemEval-2018 Task 3. Syftet med systemet är att skilja mellan ironi och icke-ironi i engelska tweets. Vi skapar en målinriktad funktionsuppsättning och analyserar hur olika funktioner är användbara i uppgiften att upptäcka ironi och uppnår en F1-poäng på 0,5914. Analysen av enskilda funktioner ger insikter som kan vara användbara i framtida försök att upptäcka ironi i tweets.', 'ta': 'This paper describes the system we submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 3.  கணினியின் இலக்கு என்னவென்றால் வேடிக்கை மற்றும் எதிர்பார்க்கவில்லை என்றும் ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து த நாம் எத்தனை வித்தியாசமான தன்மைகள் கண்டுபிடிப்பதில் பயனுள்ளது என்பதை ஆராய்க்கவும் ஒரு சேர்க்கப்பட்ட குணங்களை உருவாக்குகிறோம் மற்ற தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பண்புகளின் ஆராய்ச்சி தெரியும் பார்வையை கொடுக்கிறது இது எதிர்கால முயற்சிகளில் பயனளிக்கும்.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ کو ہم نے SemEval-2018 Task 3 کی سیسٹم کی تعریف کرتی ہے. سیسٹم کی هدف یہ ہے کہ انگلیسی ٹویٹوں میں ہنسی اور غیر ایرونی کے درمیان اختلاف کرنا ہے. ہم ایک موجود فکریٹ سیٹ بناتے ہیں اور تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کیسے مختلف فکریٹوں کا فائدہ اٹھانے کے کام میں ہے، جو 0.5914 کی F1-score تک پہنچ رہے ہیں۔ فرقہ فرقہ فرقہ کا تحلیل تفصیل توئیٹوں میں ہنسی کا تلاش کرنے کے لئے فائدہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval-2018 Vazifa 3 ga joʻnatilgan tizimni anglatadi. Tizimning maqsadi ingliz Twitterlarida keksizlik va ironisi o'rtasida ajratish. Biz tashkilotni yaratib turamiz va har xil xususiyatlarni aniqlash va 0.5914 darajaga erishishda foydalanuvchimiz. Ko'pchilik shaxsiy hususiyatlarni taʼrifi qilish birinchi Twittlarda kechilikni aniqlashda foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống chúng tôi gửi đến Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 3. Mục đích của hệ thống là phân biệt sự trớ trêu và không trớ trêu trong tiếng Anh trên Twitter. Chúng tôi tạo ra một bộ cài đặt tiêu đề và phân tích cách các tính năng khác nhau có ích trong nhiệm vụ khám phá trớ trêu, đạt được điểm số F1 của 0.5914. Phân tích các tính năng cá nhân cung cấp một sự hiểu biết có thể hữu ích trong việc tìm ra sự trớ trêu trên Twitter.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва системата, която изпратихме на задача 3. Целта на системата е да разграничи иронията и неиронията в английските туитове. Създаваме целенасочен набор от функции и анализираме как различните функции са полезни в задачата за откриване на ирония, като постигаме оценка от 0,5914. Анализът на отделните функции осигурява прозрение, което може да бъде полезно в бъдещи опити за откриване на ирония в туитове.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft het systeem dat we hebben ingediend bij SemEval-2018 Taak 3. Het doel van het systeem is om onderscheid te maken tussen ironie en non-ironie in Engelse tweets. We maken een gerichte feature set en analyseren hoe verschillende features nuttig zijn bij het detecteren van ironie, waarbij we een F1-score van 0.5914 behalen. De analyse van individuele functies geeft inzicht dat nuttig kan zijn in toekomstige pogingen om ironie in tweets op te sporen.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav koji smo predali zadatku 3. Cilj sustava je različiti ironiju i ne ironiju na engleskim tweetima. Napravili smo ciljnu osobinu i analizirali kako su različite karakteristike korisne u zadatku ironičkog otkrića, ostvarili F1 rezultat od 0,5914. Analiza pojedinačnih karakteristika pruža uvid koji može biti korisno u budućim pokušajima otkrivanja ironije u tweetima.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver det system, vi indsendte til SemEval-2018 Opgave 3. Formålet med systemet er at skelne mellem ironi og ikke-ironi i engelske tweets. Vi skaber et målrettet funktionssæt og analyserer, hvordan forskellige funktioner er nyttige i opgaven med ironidetektering, og opnår en F1-score på 0,5914. Analysen af individuelle funktioner giver indsigt, der kan være nyttigt i fremtidige forsøg på at opdage ironi i tweets.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18퀘스트3에 제출한 시스템을 소개한다.이 시스템의 목적은 영어 추문 중의 반어와 비반어를 구분하는 것이다.우리는 목적성이 있는 특징집을 만들고 서로 다른 특징이 반풍 검측 임무에서의 작용을 분석했는데 F1은 0.5914로 나뉘었다.개인의 특징에 대한 분석에 몇 가지 견해를 제공했는데 이런 견해는 앞으로 추문에서 반풍을 발견하는 데 도움이 될 것이다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را که ما به وظیفه ی نیم Eval-2018 فرستادیم توصیف می کند. هدف سیستم این است که بین آهنگی و غیر آهنگی در tweets انگلیسی اختلاف کنیم. ما یک مجموعه ویژه هدف را ایجاد می\u200cکنیم و تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که چگونه ویژه\u200cهای مختلف در کار شناسایی مسخره مفید هستند، به رسیدن یک نمونه F1 از 0.5914. تحلیل ویژه\u200cهای شخصی به نظر می\u200cرسد که ممکن است در تلاش آینده\u200cای برای شناسایی مسخره در توئیت مفید باشد.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das System, das wir an SemEval-2018 Task 3 eingereicht haben. Ziel des Systems ist es, in englischen Tweets zwischen Ironie und Nicht-Ironie zu unterscheiden. Wir erstellen ein zielgerichtetes Feature-Set und analysieren, wie verschiedene Features bei der Ironie-Erkennung nützlich sind, um einen F1-Score von 0.5914 zu erreichen. Die Analyse einzelner Features liefert Erkenntnisse, die für zukünftige Versuche nützlich sein könnten, Ironie in Tweets zu erkennen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang kami kirim ke SemEval-2018 Tugas 3. Tujuan sistem adalah untuk membedakan antara ironi dan non-ironi dalam tweet Inggris. Kami menciptakan set fitur sasaran dan menganalisis bagaimana fitur berbeda berguna dalam tugas deteksi ironi, mencapai nilai F1 0,5914. The analysis of individual features provides insight that may be useful in future attempts at detecting irony in tweets.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz halkara 2018-nji Görevi 3-ine gönderdiğimiz sistemini tassyýar. Sistemiň maksady iňlis tweetlerde döwürlenmegi bilen aýlaşdyrmak. Gürünç tanyşynyň içinde nähili farklı möhüm bolup bardygyny we çözümleşimizi bejerdik. Şahsy özellikleriň analyzasy tweetlerde gürrüňi tanamak üçin gelejekde faydaly bolup biljek pikirleri tanaýar.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo tuliouwasilisha SemEval-2018 Kazi 3. Lengo la mfumo ni kutofautisha kati ya kejeli na isiyo na kejeli katika twiti za Kiingereza. Tunaweza kutengeneza kituo kinacholengwa na kuchambua vipi tabia tofauti vinavyofaa katika kazi ya kutambua kejeli, kupata vipindi vya F1 0.5914. Uchambuzi wa vipengele binafsi unaweza kuwa na ufanisi katika jaribio la baadaye la kutambua kejeli katika twiti.', 'sq': 'This paper describes the system we submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 3.  Qëllimi i sistemit është të dallojë midis ironisë dhe jo-ironisë në tweetet angleze. Ne krijojmë një sistem objektiv dhe analizojmë se si funksione të ndryshme janë të dobishme në detyrën e zbulimit të ironisë, duke arritur një rezultat F1 prej 0.5914. Analiza e karakteristikave individuale ofron kuptim që mund të jetë i dobishëm në përpjekjet e ardhshme për të zbuluar ironinë në tweetet.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die stelsel wat ons na SemEval-2018 taak 3 ingestuur het. Die doel van die stelsel is om tussen ironie en nie-ironie in Engelske tweets te verkies. Ons skep 'n doelgemaakte funksie stel en analiseer hoe verskillende funksies nuttig is in die taak van ironiese opskrif, wat 'n F1-telling van 0.5914 bereik het. Die analisie van individuele eienskappe verskaf insig wat dalk nuttig kan wees in toekomstige probeers om ironie in tweets te ontdek.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է այն համակարգը, որը մենք ներկայացրեցինք Այս համակարգի նպատակն է տարբերակել անգլերենի թվիթերում հեգնականության և ոչ հեգնականության միջև: We create a targeted feature set and analyse how different features are useful in the task of irony detection, achieving an F1-score of 0.5914.  Անհատական հատկանիշների վերլուծությունը հնարավոր է, որ օգտակար լինի ապագա փորձերում գտնել թվիթերում հեգնությամբ:', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለSemEval-2018 ስራ 3 የሰጠነውን ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ The aim of the system is to distinguish between irony and non-irony in English tweets.  የአፍሪካ ነጥብ የ0.5914 ነጥብ እንዲደርስ እንዴት የተለየ የአፍሪካ ምርጫዎች እንዲጠቀሙ እናስተምር፡፡ የአንዳንዱ ምርጫዎች ማስታወቂያው በአሁኑ ጊዜ የፌስቡን መንግሥት ለመግኘት የሚጠቅመው ማስታወቂያ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমভাল-২০১৮ কার্যক্রম ৩ তারিখে আমরা যে সিস্টেমের প্রতি জমা দিয়েছি তা বর্ণনা করেছে। ব্যবস্থার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ইংরেজী টুইটে বিদ্রূপ এবং বিদ্রূপের মধ্যে আলাদা করা। আমরা একটি লক্ষ্যবস্তুর বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করি এবং বিশ্লেষণ করি কিভাবে বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী সনাক্ত করার কাজে কার্যকর, যা  ব্যক্তিগত বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিশ্লেষণ অনুভূতি প্রদান করেছে যে ভবিষ্যৎ টুইটে বিদ্রূপের প্রচেষ্টায় কার্যকর হতে পারে।', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt bizim SemEval-2018 G√∂nd…ôrdiyimiz Sistemi 3. Sistemin m…ôqs…ôdi ńįngilizci tweetl…ôrd…ô ironi v…ô ironi olmayan arasńĪnńĪ ayńĪrmaq. Biz m…ôqs…ôdil…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn bir f…ôrqli quruluŇü yaratdńĪq v…ô f…ôrqli f…ôrqli f…ôrqli x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôrin n…ô q…ôd…ôr faydalandńĪńüńĪnńĪ √ß…ôkdik ki, F1-score 0.5914 il…ô √ßatdńĪq. ńįnsanlarńĪn analizi twetl…ôrd…ô ironi keŇüfetm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn g…ôl…ôc…ôk √ßabalarda faydalńĪ olar.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém, který jsme předložili do SemEval-2018 Task 3. Cílem systému je rozlišit mezi ironií a non-ironií v anglických tweetech. Vytvoříme cílenou sadu funkcí a analyzujeme, jak jsou různé funkce užitečné při detekci ironie, dosažení F1 skóre 0,5914. Analýza jednotlivých funkcí poskytuje poznatky, které mohou být užitečné v budoucích pokusech o detekci ironie ve tweetech.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse süsteemi, mille esitasime SemEval-2018 ülesandele 3. Süsteemi eesmärk on eristada irooniat ja mitte-irooniat inglise säutsudes. Loome sihipärase funktsioonikomplekti ja analüüsime, kuidas erinevad funktsioonid on iroonia tuvastamisel kasulikud, saavutades F1-skoori 0,5914. Üksikute funktsioonide analüüs annab ülevaate, mis võib olla kasulik tulevastes katsetes tuvastada irooniat säutsudes.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmä, jonka lähetimme SemEval-2018 Task 3. Järjestelmän tavoitteena on erottaa ironia ja ei-ironia englanninkielisissä tweeteissä. Luomme kohdennetun ominaisuusjoukon ja analysoimme, miten eri ominaisuudet ovat hyödyllisiä ironian havaitsemisessa saavuttaen F1-pisteen 0,5914. Yksittäisten ominaisuuksien analyysi antaa tietoa, joka voi olla hyödyllistä tulevissa yrityksissä havaita ironia tweeteissä.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu el sistema que vam presentar a SemEval-2018 Task 3. L'objectiu del sistema és distingir entre ironia i no ironia en tweets anglesos. Creem un conjunt de característiques mirades i analitzem com diferents característiques són útils en la tasca de detecció d'ironia, aconseguint una puntuació F1 de 0,5914. L'anàlisi de característiques individuals proporciona una visió que pot ser útil en futurs intents de detectar ironia en els tweets.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem koji smo predali zadatku 3. Cilj sistema je različiti ironiju i ne ironiju na engleskim tweetima. Stvorimo ciljnu osobinu i analiziramo kako su različite karakteristike korisne u zadatku ironičkog otkrića, ostvariti F1-rezultat od 0,5914. Analiza pojedinačnih karakteristika pruža uvid koji može biti korisno u budućim pokušajima otkrivanja ironije u tweetima.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki dadi nggambaran sistem sing nyimpen mripan to semebal-2013 task 3. Rayakno sistem punika dipujaran gar-ujaran itoleh lan ora-irne ning tuwit Inggris. Awak dhéwé nggawe bukanyar aturan karo dipunanggé lan ujaran piye cara sing paling nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan, nggawe F1-puntu 0.5814. Genjer', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje sistem, ki smo ga poslali v nalogo 3 SemEval-2018. Cilj sistema je razlikovati med ironijo in ne-ironijo v angleških tweetih. Ustvarimo ciljno usmerjen nabor funkcij in analiziramo, kako so različne funkcije uporabne pri nalogi zaznavanja ironije, tako da dosežemo rezultat F1 0,5914. Analiza posameznih funkcij zagotavlja vpogled, ki bi lahko bil koristen v prihodnjih poskusih odkrivanja ironije v tweetih.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana tsarin da muka saka zuwa SemEV-2018 Taimar 3. Yayinsa na'ura shine a rarrabe tsakanin yin keki da abin da bai yi jayayya ba cikin littafin Ingiriya. Mu ƙiƙira wani tsarin da aka yi goani da shi, kuma Mu anayyar da jinsi masu amfani da su a cikin aikin canza za'a gane jeri, da gaskata an F1-score 0.5914. Anarari kan haske guda, yana da gane da za'a iya amfani da jarrabo masu yiwuwa a buƙata kinyuni a cikin Twitter.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת ששלחנו למשימה שלישית SemEval-2018. המטרה של המערכת היא להבדיל בין אירוניה לבין אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים. אנחנו יוצרים קבוצת תכונות מטורפת ונבחן איך תכונות שונות שימושיות במשימה של זיהוי אירוניה, להשיג נקודת F1 של 0.5914. הניתוח של תכונות אישיות מספק הבנה שאולי תהיה שימושית בניסיונות עתידים לגלות אירוניה בטוויטים.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དོན་ལ་SemEval-2018 དུས་བཀོལ་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་གསུམ་གནང་བ་རེད། མ་ལག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡུལ་གྱི་འགྱུར་བ་དང་ཁི་དོན་མེད་པའི་དབར་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་ཕྱགས་རྒྱུ་ཡིན། We create a targeted feature set and analyse how different features are useful in the task of irony detection, achieving an F1-score of 0.5914. ངོ་མ་རང་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་མ་འོངས་བའི་དཔའ་བཅས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་རྟོགས་ཐུབ།'}
{'en': 'INAOE-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : An Ensemble Approach for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'ar': 'INAOE-UPV في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: نهج الفرقة للكشف عن المفارقة في تويتر', 'es': 'El INAOE-UPV en la Tarea 3 de Semeval-2018: Un enfoque conjunto para la detección de ironía en Twitter', 'fr': "INAOE-UPV au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 3\xa0: Une approche d'ensemble pour la détection de l'ironie sur Twitter", 'pt': 'INAOE-UPV na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Uma abordagem de conjunto para detecção de ironia no Twitter', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018でのINAOE - UPVタスク3 ： Twitterでのアイロニー検出のためのアンサンブルアプローチ', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर INAOE-UPV: चहचहाना में विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए एक पहनावा दृष्टिकोण', 'zh': 'INAOE-UPVŚú®SemEval-2018Śä°3:TwitterŚąļś£ÄšĻčś≥ē', 'ru': 'INAOE-UPV на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Ансамблевый подход к обнаружению иронии в Twitter', 'ga': 'INAOE-UPV ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Cur Chuige Ensemble chun íoróin a Bhrath ar Twitter', 'hu': 'INAOE-UPV a SemEval-2018 3. feladaton: Együttes megközelítés az irónia felismeréséhez Twitteren', 'kk': 'INAOE-UPV жарым- 2018 тапсырмасы 3: Твиттердегі Ирония анықтау үшін ұқсас жағдайы', 'it': "INAOE-UPV al SemEval-2018 Task 3: Un approccio di gruppo per il rilevamento dell'ironia su Twitter", 'ka': 'INAOE', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Μια προσέγγιση συνόλου για την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στο Twitter', 'mk': 'ИНАОЕ-УПВ на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Енсемблен пристап за идентификација на иронија на Твитер', 'ms': 'INAOE-UPV di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Pendekatan Bersama-sama untuk Pengesanan Ironi dalam Twitter', 'mn': 'INAOE-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: An Ensemble Approach for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'lt': 'INAOE-UPV „SemEval-2018“ 3 užduotis: bendras požiūris į ironijos nustatymą Twitter', 'no': 'INAOE-UPV på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Ein tilnærming for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3-ല്\u200d INAOE-UPV:', 'mt': 'INAOE-UPV f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 3: Approċċ Ensemble for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'sr': 'INAOE-UPV na pola Evala-2018 Task 3: Pristup za proširenje Ironije u Twitter', 'pl': 'INAOE-UPV na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Podejście zespołowe do wykrywania ironii na Twitterze', 'ro': 'INAOE-UPV la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: O abordare în ansamblu pentru detectarea ironiei în Twitter', 'ta': 'செம்வால்- 2018 பணியில் உள்ள INAOE- UPV: தொடர்பில் ஐரோனிய கண்டுபிடிப்பிற்கான ஒரு ஒற்றைப்படையான அணுகல்', 'si': 'INAOE-UPV at Half-2018 Job 3: A Ensemble approach for Ironic Detection in Twitter', 'so': 'INAOE-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Ensemable Approach for Garoonka Internetka', 'sv': 'INAOE-UPV på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: En ansats för att upptäcka ironi på Twitter', 'ur': 'INAOE-UPV ٹویٹر میں سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۳ میں ایک انجیمبل تقریبا', 'uz': '3 Vazifani SemEval- 2018 yilda INAOE- UPV: Twitterda Ironni aniqlash uchun yetarli', 'vi': 'INAO-UPV tại SemEvl-208 Task 3: A Ensemble tiếp cận phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Ансамбълен подход за откриване на ирония в Туитър', 'hr': 'INAOE-UPV na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 3: Pristup za proširenje Ironije u Twitter-u', 'da': 'INAOE-UPV på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: En Ensemble Tilgang til Irony Detection i Twitter', 'nl': 'INAOE-UPV op SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Een ensemblebenadering voor ironie detectie in Twitter', 'fa': 'INAOE', 'de': 'Aufgabe 3: Ein Ensembleansatz zur Ironie Detection in Twitter', 'id': 'INAOE-UPV di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: An Ensemble Approach for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'ko': 'INAOE-UPV가SemEval-18 미션3: 트위터 반풍 검출의 통합 방법', 'sw': 'INAOE-UPV katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Utafiti wa Kutambua Uchunguzi wa Kihai kwenye mtandao wa Twita', 'tr': 'INAOE-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: An Ensemble Approach for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'af': "INAOE-UPV by SemEval-2018 Taak 3: ' n Ensemble Approach vir Irony Detection in Twitter", 'am': 'INAOE-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: An Ensemble Approach for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'sq': 'INAOE-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: An Ensemble Approach for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'hy': 'INAOE-UPV-ը, 2018 թվականի "Սեմվալ"-ի 3. հանձնարարությունը. Թվիթերում գտնվող երկրագնդի հայտնագործման համակարգ մոտեցում', 'az': 'INAOE-UPV: Tövratdakı İroni Keşfetməsi üçün Ünval-2018 Görevi 3: Tövratdakı İroni Yaxınlığı', 'bs': 'INAOE-UPV na pola Evala-2018 Task 3: Pristup za proširenje Ironije u Twitter', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩-এ ইনাওই-উপিভি: টুইটারে আইরোনি সন্ধানের জন্য এক সেমেবাল রাস্তা', 'ca': 'INAOE-UPV a SemEval-2018 Task 3: An Ensemble Approach for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'cs': 'INAOE-UPV na SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Souborový přístup k detekci ironie na Twitteru', 'et': 'INAOE-UPV SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 3: Ensemble lähenemisviis iroonia tuvastamiseks Twitteris', 'fi': 'INAOE-UPV SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemble Approach for Irony Detection in Twitter', 'jv': 'INNOE-UNV at semi-2020 task 3: an ENsemble Method for irny detection in Google', 'sk': 'INAOE-UPV na SemEval-2018 naloga 3: Ensemble pristop za odkrivanje ironije v Twitterju', 'he': 'INAOE-UPV ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: גישה קבועה לגילוי אירוניה בטוויטר', 'ha': 'INAOU-UPV at SemEV-2018 Tafiyar 3: An Ensemble Approach for Iron Finding in Twitter', 'bo': 'INAOE-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 3: an Ensemble Approach for Irony Detection in Twitter'}
{'en': 'This paper describes an ensemble approach to the SemEval-2018 Task 3. The proposed method is composed of two renowned methods in text classification together with a novel approach for capturing ironic content by exploiting a tailored lexicon for irony detection. We experimented with different ensemble settings. The obtained results show that our method has a good performance for detecting the presence of ironic content in Twitter.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نهجًا جماعيًا لمهمة SemEval-2018 3. تتكون الطريقة المقترحة من طريقتين مشهورتين في تصنيف النص جنبًا إلى جنب مع نهج جديد لالتقاط المحتوى الساخر من خلال استغلال معجم مخصص للكشف عن السخرية. جربنا إعدادات المجموعة المختلفة. تظهر النتائج التي تم الحصول عليها أن طريقتنا لديها أداء جيد للكشف عن وجود محتوى ساخر في تويتر.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve uma abordagem de conjunto para a Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2018. O método proposto é composto por dois métodos renomados de classificação de texto, juntamente com uma nova abordagem para capturar conteúdo irônico, explorando um léxico adaptado para detecção de ironia. Experimentamos diferentes configurações de conjunto. Os resultados obtidos mostram que nosso método tem um bom desempenho para detectar a presença de conteúdo irônico no Twitter.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit une approche d'ensemble de la tâche 3 SEMEval-2018. La méthode proposée est composée de deux méthodes renommées de classification de texte ainsi que d'une nouvelle approche pour capturer le contenu ironique en exploitant un lexique personnalisé pour la détection de l'ironie. Nous avons expérimenté différentes configurations d'ensemble. Les résultats obtenus montrent que notre méthode présente de bonnes performances pour détecter la présence de contenu ironique sur Twitter.", 'es': 'Este documento describe un enfoque conjunto de la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018. El método propuesto se compone de dos métodos de renombre en la clasificación de textos junto con un enfoque novedoso para capturar contenido irónico mediante la explotación de un léxico personalizado para la detección de ironía. Experimentamos con diferentes configuraciones de conjuntos. Los resultados obtenidos muestran que nuestro método tiene un buen rendimiento para detectar la presencia de contenido irónico en Twitter.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018タスク3へのアンサンブルアプローチについて説明する。提案された方法は、テキスト分類における２つの有名な方法と、皮肉検出のためにテーラリングされた辞書を利用することによって皮肉な内容を取り込むための新規のアプローチとで構成されている。さまざまなアンサンブルの設定を実験しました。得られた結果は、当社の方法がTwitterに皮肉なコンテンツが存在することを検出するための優れたパフォーマンスを持っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文引SemEval-2018务3集成法。 文本分类二名及量身制之词典讽刺性检以获刺刺之新。 我们试了不同的融合设置。 结果表明,检Twitter有讽刺之性。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 के लिए एक पहनावा दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है। प्रस्तावित विधि पाठ वर्गीकरण में दो प्रसिद्ध तरीकों से मिलकर बनाई गई है, जिसमें विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए एक अनुरूप शब्दकोश का शोषण करके विडंबनात्मक सामग्री पर कब्जा करने के लिए एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण है। हमने विभिन्न पहनावा सेटिंग्स के साथ प्रयोग किया। प्राप्त परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि चहचहाना में विडंबनापूर्ण सामग्री की उपस्थिति का पता लगाने के लिए एक अच्छा प्रदर्शन है.', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе описывается комплексный подход к задаче 3 SemEval-2018. Предложенный метод состоит из двух известных методов в классификации текста вместе с новым подходом для захвата иронического содержания путем использования адаптированного лексикона для обнаружения иронии. Мы экспериментировали с разными настройками ансамбля. Полученные результаты показывают, что наш метод имеет хорошую производительность для обнаружения наличия иронического контента в Twitter.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chur chuige ensemble i leith Thasc SemEval-2018 3. Tá an modh atá beartaithe comhdhéanta de dhá mhodh clúiteach i rangú téacs mar aon le cur chuige nua chun ábhar íorónta a ghabháil trí leas a bhaint as foclóir sainoiriúnaithe chun íoróin a bhrath. Bhaineamar triail as socruithe éagsúla ensemble. Léiríonn na torthaí a fuarthas go bhfuil feidhmíocht mhaith ag ár modh chun láithreacht ábhar íorónta ar Twitter a bhrath.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει μια προσέγγιση συνόλου στο έργο 3. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος αποτελείται από δύο γνωστές μεθόδους ταξινόμησης κειμένου σε συνδυασμό με μια νέα προσέγγιση για την καταγραφή ειρωνικού περιεχομένου χρησιμοποιώντας ένα προσαρμοσμένο λεξικό για την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας. Πειραματιστήκαμε με διαφορετικά σύνολα. Τα αποτελέσματα που προκύπτουν δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας έχει καλή απόδοση για την ανίχνευση της παρουσίας ειρωνικού περιεχομένου στο Twitter.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 feladat együttes megközelítését. A javasolt módszer két elismert szövegosztályozási módszerből áll, valamint egy új megközelítésből áll az ironikus tartalom rögzítésére egy személyre szabott lexikon kihasználásával az ironia felismerésére. Különböző összeállításokkal kísérleteztünk. A kapott eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk jó teljesítményt nyújt az ironikus tartalom jelenlétének felismerésére a Twitteren.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive un approccio complesso al Task 3 SemEval-2018. Il metodo proposto è composto da due rinomati metodi di classificazione del testo insieme ad un nuovo approccio per catturare contenuti ironici sfruttando un lessico su misura per la rilevazione dell'ironia. Abbiamo sperimentato diverse ambientazioni di ensemble. I risultati ottenuti dimostrano che il nostro metodo ha buone prestazioni per rilevare la presenza di contenuti ironici su Twitter.", 'ka': 'ამ დომენტი სამუშაო-2018 დავალების სამუშაო სამუშაო დაწყება. პროგრამის შესაძლებელი მეტი ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციაში ორი უცნობილი მეტისგან შექმნა, რომელიც პრომენტიური შესაძლებლობად იპონიკური შესახებ შესახებ, იპონიკური შესახებ გამოყ ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით განსხვავებული ინსნემბლის პარამეტრებით. მიღებული წარმოდგენების შემდეგ ჩვენი მეთოდის შესაძლებლობა გახსნა, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდის შესაძლებლობა იპონიკური შესახებ Twitter-ში.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз жарым- 2018 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасының жарықтығын таңдайды. Келтірілген әдіс мәтін классификациясындағы екі әдістерден құрылады, ironic мазмұнын түсіру үшін, irony анықтау үшін керек лексиконды қолдану үшін романдық әдістерімен бірге жазылады. Біз басқа ензембл параметрлерімен тәжірибедік. Табылған нәтижелер біздің әдіміміздің Твиттерде ирониялық мазмұның барлығын анықтау үшін жақсы әсер ететін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan ensemble ke SemEval-2018 Tugas 3. Kaedah yang diusulkan terdiri dari dua kaedah terkenal dalam klasifikasi teks bersama dengan pendekatan baru untuk menangkap kandungan ironik dengan mengeksploitasi leksikon yang disesuaikan untuk pengesan ironi. Kami eksperimen dengan tetapan ensemble yang berbeza. The obtained results show that our method has a good performance for detecting the presence of ironic content in Twitter.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi approċċ globali għall-Kompitu SemEval-2018 3. Il-metodu propost huwa magħmul minn żewġ metodi magħrufa fil-klassifikazzjoni tat-test flimkien ma’ approċċ ġdid għall-qbid tal-kontenut ironiku billi jiġi sfruttat lexicon imfassal apposta għall-individwazzjoni tal-ironija. Esperimentajna b’setturi differenti ta’ ensemble. Ir-riżultati miksuba juru li l-metodu tagħna għandu prestazzjoni tajba biex jinstab il-preżenza ta’ kontenut ironiku fuq Twitter.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašytas požiūris į pusiau vertinimo 2018 m. užduotį 3. Siūlomą metodą sudaro du žinomi teksto klasifikavimo metodai ir naujas metodas ironiniam turiniui surinkti naudojant pritaikytą ironijai aptikti skirtą lexikoną. Eksperimentavome su skirtingais ansamblių nustatymais. Gauti rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gerai veikia nustatant ironinį turinį Twitter.', 'mk': 'Овој документ опишува ансемблен пристап до SemEval-2018 задачата 3. Предложениот метод се состои од два познати методи во текстовата класификација заедно со нов пристап за заземање ироничка содржина со искористување соодветен лексикон за детекција на иронија. Експериментиравме со различни услови. Добиените резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод има добра изведба за детектирање на присуството на иронична содржина на Твитер.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-2018 Task 3-ийн загварын загварыг тайлбарладаг. Энэ санал өгсөн арга нь текст хуваалтын хоёр нэртэй арга юм. Энэ арга нь галзуу ойлголтын тулд шинэ арга зам барих арга юм. Бид өөр төрлийн загвартай туршилт хийсэн. Шинэ үр дүнд бидний арга нь Твиттерт гайхамшигтай сорилтуудыг олж мэдэхэд сайн үйл ажиллагаатай гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje zespołowe podejście do zadania SemEval-2018 3. Proponowana metoda składa się z dwóch renomowanych metod klasyfikacji tekstu wraz z nowatorskim podejściem do przechwytywania treści ironicznych poprzez wykorzystanie dostosowanego leksykonu do wykrywania ironii. Eksperymentowaliśmy z różnymi ustawieniami zespołu. Uzyskane wyniki pokazują, że nasza metoda ma dobrą wydajność do wykrywania obecności ironicznych treści w Twitterze.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 3-ലേക്കുള്ള ഒരു പ്രാധാന്യം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രണ്ട് പേരുള്ള രീതിയില്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പരിഹസിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d പരിശോധി നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ കൂടെ പരീക്ഷിച്ചു. സമ്പാദിച്ചതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ടൂട്ടറിലെ പരിഹാസകാര്യങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയെ കണ്ടെത്', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 3 විසින් සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශයක් තියෙනවා. ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විධානය තමයි ලිපින්ත විධානයක් වලින් ලිපින්ත විධානයක් වලින් සංවිධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් විධානයක් සමඟ ස අපි වෙනස් සෙන්ස්ම්බල් සැකසුම් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණය කළා. ගත්ත ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතියක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදිහට ට්විටර් ව', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver ein ensemble tilnærming til halvEval-2018 oppgåva 3. Dette første metoden er lagt av to kjent metodar i tekstklassifikasjon saman med eit nytt tilnærming for å henta ironisk innhald ved å bruka eit tilpassa leksikon for ironisk oppdaging. Vi eksperimenterte med ulike innstillingar for ensemble. Dette opptekte resultatet viser at metoden vårt har ein god utvikling for å oppdaga eksisterende ironisk innhald i Twitter.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie o abordare ansamblă a sarcinii SemEval-2018 3. Metoda propusă este compusă din două metode renumite în clasificarea textelor împreună cu o abordare nouă pentru captarea conținutului ironic prin exploatarea unui lexicon adaptat pentru detectarea ironiei. Am experimentat cu diferite setări de ansamblu. Rezultatele obținute arată că metoda noastră are o performanță bună pentru detectarea prezenței conținutului ironic în Twitter.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup obeshrabrenom zadatku 3. Predložena metoda je sastavljena od dva poznata metoda u tekstskoj klasifikaciji zajedno sa novim pristupom za uhvativanje ironičkog sadržaja iskorištavanjem preglednog leksikona za ironičko otkrivanje. Eksperimentirali smo sa različitim postavkama. Nabavljeni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod ima dobru predstavu za otkrivanje prisustva ironičkog sadržaja na Twitter-u.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் SemEval-2018 பணி 3 க்கு ஒரு ஒத்திசையை விவரிக்கிறது. முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட இரண்டு பிரியப்பட்ட முறைகளில் உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் முறைமையில் ஒன்று சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது முறைமையில் ஒரு புதிய முறையி நாங்கள் வேறு வித்தியாசமான ஒளி அமைப்புகளை பரிசோதித்தோம். பெற்ற முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்றால் தெரியும் எங்கள் முறைமையில் ஒரு நல்ல செயல்பாடு இருக்கிறது என', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran karaa qaab aad u leedahay SemEval-2018 shaqo 3. Midabka la soo jeedo waxaa ka mid ah laba qaabab magac leh oo ku qoran qoraal-fasax iyo qaab warqad ah oo ku qoran si aad u qabsato waxyaabaha ironiska ah si aad u isticmaasho baaritaanka leksisinka la qoray. Waxaynu ku jirrabnay xarumaha noocyo kala duduwan. Arrimaha la helay waxay muuqataa in qaabkeennu ay leedahay sameyn wanaagsan oo ay ku ogaato meesha ay ku jirto waxyaabaha ironicka ah ee Twitterka.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver en ansats till SemEval-2018 Task 3. Den föreslagna metoden består av två kända metoder inom textklassificering tillsammans med en ny metod för att fånga ironiskt innehåll genom att utnyttja ett skräddarsytt lexikon för ironidetektering. Vi experimenterade med olika ensembleinställningar. De erhållna resultaten visar att vår metod har en bra prestanda för att upptäcka förekomsten av ironiskt innehåll i Twitter.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ نے SemEval-2018 ٹاکس 3 کے لئے ایک مضبوط طریقہ کا مفصل بیان کرتا ہے. پیغمبر کی طریقہ دو معروف طریقوں سے پیغام کی کلاسیفوں میں پیغام کے ساتھ پیغام کی طریقہ کے ساتھ پیغام پہنچانے کے لئے ایرونیک موتوں کو پکڑنے کے لئے پیغام پہنچانے کے ذریعہ بنایا گیا ہے. ہم نے مختلف اندازے کے ساتھ آزمائش کی۔ پائی ہوئی نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ توئیٹر میں ایرونیک موجود موجود ہونے کے لئے اچھی فعالیت ہے.', 'uz': 'Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 Vazifa 3 vazifasiga yetarli bir embel usulni aytadi. Name Biz boshqa odamning moslamalari bilan jarayotdik. Muvaffaqiyatli natijalari Twitterda ironik tarkibini aniqlashning usuli yaxshi bajarishi mumkin.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả một cách tiếp cận chung với nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 3. Phương pháp được đề nghị gồm hai phương pháp nổi tiếng trong việc phân loại văn bản cùng với một phương pháp mới để bắt giữ nội dung mỉa mai bằng cách dùng ngôn ngữ riêng để phát hiện mỉa mai. Chúng tôi đã thử nghiệm với các thiết lập chung. Kết quả cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi có trình diễn tốt để tìm ra sự có mặt của nội dung trớ trêu trên Twitter.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup slobodnoj to čki zadatku 3. Predložena je metoda sastavljena od dva poznata metoda u tekstskoj klasifikaciji zajedno s novim pristupom za uhvaćenje ironičkog sadržaja koristeći prilagođeni leksikon za ironički otkrivanje. Eksperimentirali smo sa različitim postavkama ensembla. Nabavljeni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod ima dobru predstavu za otkrivanje prisutnosti ironičkog sadržaja na Twitter-u.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва ансамбълен подход към задача 3. Предложеният метод е съставен от два известни метода за класификация на текста заедно с нов подход за улавяне на иронично съдържание чрез използване на персонализиран лексикон за откриване на ирония. Експериментирахме с различни групи. Получените резултати показват, че методът ни има добра производителност за откриване на наличието на иронично съдържание в Туитър.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft een ensemblebenadering van de SemEval-2018 Taak 3. De voorgestelde methode bestaat uit twee gerenommeerde methoden in tekstclassificatie samen met een nieuwe benadering voor het vastleggen van ironische inhoud door gebruik te maken van een op maat gemaakt lexicon voor ironie detectie. We experimenteerden met verschillende ensemble settings. De verkregen resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode een goede prestatie heeft voor het detecteren van de aanwezigheid van ironische inhoud in Twitter.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver en ensemble tilgang til SemEval-2018 Opgave 3. Den foreslåede metode består af to kendte metoder i tekstklassifikation sammen med en ny tilgang til at fange ironisk indhold ved at udnytte et skræddersyet leksikon til ironidetektion. Vi eksperimenterede med forskellige ensemble indstillinger. De opnåede resultater viser, at vores metode har en god ydeevne til at detektere tilstedeværelsen af ironisk indhold i Twitter.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt einen Ensembleansatz für die SemEval-2018 Task 3. Die vorgeschlagene Methode setzt sich aus zwei renommierten Methoden der Textklassifizierung zusammen mit einem neuartigen Ansatz zur Erfassung ironischer Inhalte durch Nutzung eines maßgeschneiderten Lexikons zur Ironie-Erkennung. Wir experimentierten mit verschiedenen Ensemble-Settings. Die erhaltenen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode eine gute Leistung hat, um das Vorhandensein ironischer Inhalte in Twitter zu erkennen.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک دستور غیر قابل توصیف برای کار ۳ نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ را توصیف می\u200cکند. این روش پیشنهاد از دو روش شناخته شده در ترکیب متن با یک روش نویسی برای گرفتن محتوای مسخره با استفاده از یک لکسیون تنظیم برای شناسایی مسخره است. ما با تنظیمات انجمن مختلف آزمایش کردیم. نتیجه\u200cهای دریافت شده نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما اجرای خوبی دارد برای کشف موجود محتوای مسخره در توئیتر.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18퀘스트3의 집적 방법을 묘사하였다.이 방법은 두 가지 유명한 텍스트 분류 방법과 새로운 방법으로 구성되어 있으며, 이 방법은 맞춤형 어휘를 이용하여 풍자 검측을 통해 풍자 내용을 얻는다.우리는 서로 다른 합주 설정을 시도했다.그 결과 우리의 방법은 트위터의 풍자 내용을 검출하는 데 좋은 성능을 가진 것으로 나타났다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan pendekatan ensemble untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 3. Metode yang diusulkan terdiri dari dua metode terkenal dalam klasifikasi teks bersama dengan pendekatan baru untuk menangkap konten ironis dengan mengeksploitasi leksikon yang disesuaikan untuk deteksi ironi. Kami eksperimen dengan pengaturan ensemble yang berbeda. Hasil yang diperoleh menunjukkan bahwa metode kita memiliki prestasi yang baik untuk mendeteksi kehadiran konten ironis di Twitter.', 'sw': 'Papa hii inaelezea mbinu za kifupi kwa ajili ya kazi 3 ya SemEval-2018. Utawala unapendekezwa umetengenezwa na mbinu mbili maarufu katika kutangazwa kwa ujumbe wa maandishi pamoja na njia ya riwaya kwa kutafuta maudhui ya kejeli kwa kutumia lexico yenye uchunguzi wa kejeli. Tulijaribu kwa mazingira tofauti. Matokeo yaliyopata yanaonyesha kuwa njia yetu in a ufanisi mzuri kwa kutambua uwepo wa maudhui ya kejeli kwenye mtandao wa Twita.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSemEval-2018 ስራ 3 የሚደረገውን የስብሰባ ሥርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት በጽሑፍ ክፍተት ውስጥ ሁለት የተታወቀ ሥርዓቶች በተጨማሪም የኢንተርናዊ ቦታዎችን ለመያዝ የረኀብ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ በተለያዩ አካባቢ ምርጫዎች ፈተናን:: የተገኘው ፍሬዎች በትዊተር ላይ የፀሐይ ጥቅም መሆኑን ለማግኘት የሥልጣን ሥርዓት ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval-2018 Görevi 3 ýagdaýa golaýyny tassyýar. Taýýarlanan metin klasifikasynda iki tanyş yöntemden beýlenýär. Iňe gürrüňli deteksion üçin ýerleşýän leksikon tapmak üçin bir roman yaklaşyk bilen. Biz dürli ensemble düzümleri bilen synanyşdyrdyk. Ilkinji netijeler netijelerimiziň Twitter-da ironik maksadyň bardygyny tapmak üçin gowy bir täsirimiz bar.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe 'n ensemble toegang tot die SemEval-2018 taak 3. Die voorgestelde metode is gemaak van twee hernoem metodes in teks klasifikasie saam met 'n nuwe toegang vir ironiese inhoud te vang deur 'n sterkte leksikoon te gebruik vir ironiese opskrif. Ons het eksperimenteer met verskillende ensemble instellings. Die verkry resultate wys dat ons metode 'n goeie uitvoering het vir die beslag van ironiese inhoud in Twitter.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է SEM-2018-ի 3-րդ հանձնարարության համակարգչային մոտեցումը: Պատրաստված մեթոդը կազմված է երկու հայտնի մեթոդներից տեքստի դասակարգում, միասին նոր մոտեցումների հետ, որոնք օգտագործում են հեգնական պարունակությունը օգտագործելով պատրաստված լեքսիկոն հեգնական հայտնաբերելու համար: Մենք փորձեցինք տարբեր համակարգերի միջոցով: Հաջորդ արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը լավ արդյունք ունի, որպեսզի հայտնաբերի հեգնական պարունակությունը Թվիթերում:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩ এর কাছে একটি প্রতিযোগিতায় বর্ণনা করেছে। এই প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি টেক্সফিকেশনে দুটি নামের মাধ্যমে তৈরি করা হয়েছে এবং তারা বিদ্রোহী সন্ধানের জন্য একটি লেক্সিকোর ব্যবহার করার জন্য একটি নোভেল আমরা বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন সংক্রান্ত বৈশিষ্ট্য দিয়ে পরীক্ষা করেছি। পেয়েছে ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে টুইটারে বিদ্রূপের উপস্থিতি খুঁজে বের করার জন্য আমাদের পদ্ধতি ভালো কার্যকর।', 'az': "Bu kağıt SemEval-2018 Görevi 3-si ilə müəyyən edilən tərzini təsbiq edir. Bu təbliğ metodu, ironi tanıtmaq üçün dəyişdirilmiş bir leksikon istifadə edərək ironik məlumatı almaq üçün yeni bir yolla birlikdə mətn klasifikasyonunda iki ünlü metodlardan oluşur. Biz müxtəlif ensemble ayarları ilə imtahana çəkdik. Yaxılmış sonuçlar Twitter'da ironiq məlumatının varlığını keşfetmək üçün yolumuzun yaxşı performans olduğunu göstərir.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup poluvremenoj evaluaciji-2018 zadatku 3. Predložena metoda je sastavljena od dva poznata metoda u tekstskoj klasifikaciji zajedno sa novim pristupom za uhvativanje ironičkog sadržaja iskorištavanjem preurednog leksikona za ironičko otkrivanje. Eksperimentirali smo sa različitim postavkama. Nabavljeni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod ima dobru predstavu za otkrivanje prisutnosti ironičkog sadržaja na Twitter-u.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje souborový přístup k úkolu SemEval-2018 3. Navržená metoda je složena ze dvou renomovaných metod klasifikace textů spolu s novým přístupem pro zachycení ironického obsahu využitím šitého lexikonu pro detekci ironie. Experimentovali jsme s různými souborovými nastaveními. Získané výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda má dobrý výkon pro detekci přítomnosti ironického obsahu na Twitteru.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu un enfocament conjunt a la tasca 3 de SemEval-2018. El mètode proposat està compost de dos mètodes renombrats en la classificació de textos juntament amb un nou enfocament per capturar continguts irònics explotant un lexicó adaptat a la detecció d'ironia. We experimented with different ensemble settings.  Els resultats obtenits demostren que el nostre mètode té un bon rendiment per detectar la presença de contingut irònic a Twitter.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan një metodë të përbashkët ndaj detyrës 3 të SemEval-2018. The proposed method is composed of two renowned methods in text classification together with a novel approach for capturing ironic content by exploiting a tailored lexicon for irony detection.  Eksperimentuam me rregullime të ndryshme të ansamblit. Rezultatet e fituara tregojnë se metoda jonë ka një shfaqje të mirë për zbulimin e pranisë së përmbajtjes ironike në Twitter.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse ansambli lähenemisviisi SemEval-2018 ülesandele 3. Kavandatud meetod koosneb kahest tuntud teksti klassifitseerimise meetodist ning uudsest lähenemisviisist iroonilise sisu jäädvustamiseks, kasutades iroonia tuvastamiseks kohandatud leksikoni. Me eksperimenteerisime erinevate ansamblite seadistustega. Saadud tulemused näitavad, et meie meetodil on hea jõudlus iroonilise sisu tuvastamiseks Twitteris.', 'fi': 'T채ss채 artikkelissa kuvataan kokonaisuutta koskeva l채hestymistapa SemEval-2018 Task 3 -teht채v채채n. Ehdotettu menetelm채 koostuu kahdesta tunnetusta tekstiluokittelumenetelm채st채 sek채 uudesta l채hestymistavasta ironisen sis채ll철n taltiointiin hy철dynt채m채ll채 r채채t채l철ity채 sanastoa ironian havaitsemiseksi. Kokeilimme eri kokoonpanoja. Tulokset osoittavat, ett채 menetelm채ll채 on hyv채 suorituskyky ironisen sis채ll철n havaitsemisessa Twitteriss채.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambaran tanggal nggo ngerasakno kanggo semebal-2020 task 3 Awakdhéwé nggawe sistem sing sampeyan iki luwih apik Kelaran seng pisan ambem karo Ndelem kuwi perintah dumadhi kanggo nggawe barang irbonis seng apik dhéwé ngerasai luwih apik kebuturan. Awak dhéwé éneng pisan karo aturan angel sing gawe Rasané awakdhéwé éntuk ngomong nik wektu nggawe sistem sing apik dhéwé kanggo ngerasakno perbudhakan irènik nang Tom.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan pristop skupine k nalogi 3 SemEval-2018. Predlagana metoda je sestavljena iz dveh znanih metod klasifikacije besedila skupaj z novim pristopom za zajemanje ironične vsebine z izkoriščanjem prilagojenega leksikona za odkrivanje ironije. Eksperimentirali smo z različnimi nastavitvami ansambla. Dobljeni rezultati kažejo, da ima naša metoda dobro učinkovitost pri odkrivanju prisotnosti ironične vsebine v Twitterju.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מתאר גישה לאנסמל למשימה השלישית של SemEval-2018. השיטה המוצעת מורכבת משני שיטות מכובדות בהקליטה טקסטית יחד עם גישה חדשה לכיסוי תוכן אירוני על ידי ניצול לקסיקון מתאים לזיהוי אירוניה. ניסונו עם סדרות אחרות. התוצאות הנקבלות מראות שלשיטתנו יש ביצוע טוב לגלות נוכחות תוכן אירוני בטוויטר.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faЙ—aЙ—a wata masallГЈci zuwa Taimar 3. Tsarin da aka buЙ—e shi yana daga metode biyu wanda aka suna cikin siffarwa matsayi sami da wata hanyor nohannu dГөmin ka kГЈma maЙ“allin jerin da ya yi amfani da kwamfyuta mai Жҷaranci wa gane jerin. Ko jarraba shi da wasu misГЈlai dabam-dabam. Mataimakin da aka samu ya nuna cewa metodenmu yana da mafiya kyakkyawan aikin da za'a gane presence da maЙ“allin jerin a Twitter.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval-2018 དྲ་ཡིག་གི་གནད་དོན་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་པ་དེ་རེད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་ཡིག་གེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་མཚོན་རྟགས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་མ་འདྲ་བ་བསྟན་པའི་སྒེར་གྱིས་རེ་བྱེད་བྱུང་། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་མངོན་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྟབས་བདེ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པས་ཌིས་ཌིར་ནང་དུ་འ'}
{'en': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : A Naive Approach to Irony Detection', 'ar': 'KLUEnicorn في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: نهج ساذج للكشف عن السخرية', 'es': 'KlueniCorn en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Un enfoque ingenuo para la detección de ironía', 'pt': 'KLUEnicorn na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Uma abordagem ingênua para detecção de ironia', 'fr': "KlueNicorn au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 3\xa0: Une approche naïve de la détection de l'ironie", 'ja': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval -2018 Task 3: A Naive Approach to Irony Detection', 'zh': 'KLUEnicornåœ¨SemEval-2018åŠ¡3:åˆºæ£€ä¹‹ç´\xa0ä¹Ÿ', 'ru': 'KLUEnicorn на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Наивный подход к обнаружению иронии', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर KLUEnicorn: विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए एक भोले दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'KLUEnicorn ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Cur Chuige Naive maidir le Brath na híoróine', 'ka': 'KLUEnicorn ნა SemEval-2018 პაბჲრა 3: თპჲნთ ევრვკუთთ£ა ნათგნა ოპთჟლვე', 'hu': 'KLUEnicorn a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Naiv megközelítés az irónia felismeréséhez', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Μια αφελής προσέγγιση στην ανίχνευση ειρωνείας', 'it': "KLUEnicorn al SemEval-2018 Task 3: Un approccio ingenuo alla rilevazione dell'ironia", 'kk': 'KLUEnicorn 30- 2018 тапсырмасында 3: Ирония тапсырмасының жақсы жағдай', 'mk': 'КЛУЕникорн на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Наивен пристап до идентификацијата на иронијата', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3- ലെ കെലൂയിനിക്കോര്\u200dണ്\u200d: ഇറോണിയുടെ ഡിറ്റീഷനിലേക്കുള്ള ഒരു നീവ് വഴി', 'mt': 'KLUEnicorn f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 3: Approċċ Naiv għad-Detezzjoni tal-Ironja', 'mn': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Naive Approach to Irony Detection', 'no': 'KLUEnicorn på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Eit naive tilnærming til Irony Detection', 'lt': 'KLUEnicorn programos „SemEval-2018“ 3 užduotis: neigiamas požiūris į ironijos nustatymą', 'pl': 'KLUEnicorn na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Naiwne podejście do wykrywania ironii', 'ms': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Naive Approach to Irony Detection', 'si': 'KLUEnicorn at semeval-2018 Job 3: A Nave approach to Ironic Detection', 'ro': 'KLUEnicorn la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: O abordare naivă a detectării ironiei', 'sr': 'KLUEnicorn na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 3: Najni pristup detekciji Ironije', 'so': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Naive Approach to Ironium', 'sv': 'KLUEnicorn på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: En naiv strategi för att upptäcka ironi', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 3 میں کلیونیکورن: آئرونی شناسایی کے لئے ایک نہایت تقرب', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KNgài công ty KNgài ở SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 3: A Naidã tiếp cận Phát hiện phòng luyện sắt.', 'bg': 'Клуеникорн на Задача 3: Наивен подход към откриването на ирония', 'de': 'KLUEnicorn auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Ein naiver Ansatz zur Ironie Detektion', 'da': 'KLUEnicorn på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: En naiv tilgang til sporing af ironi', 'nl': 'KLUEnicorn op SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Een naïeve benadering van ironie detectie', 'ko': 'KLUEnicorn이SemEval-18에서의 퀘스트 3: 반풍 검측의 천진한 방법', 'fa': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Naive Approach to Irony Detection', 'sw': 'KLUEnicorn katika SemEval-2018 Task 3: Kuelekea Nazi kwa Kugundua Uholanzi', 'tr': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Naive Approach to Irony Detection', 'sq': 'KLUEnicorn në SemEval-2018 Detyra 3: Një metodë naive për zbulimin e ironisë', 'hr': 'KLUEnicorn na pola ispitivanja 2018. zadatak 3: naglašen pristup detekciji željeza', 'af': "KLUEnicorn by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 3: 'n Naamlike toegang na Irony Deteksie", 'am': 'ስራ 3:', 'az': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Naive Approach to Irony Detection', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩-এ কে- লুইএনিকোর্ন: আইরোনিয়ান ডিটেক্টরের কাছে একটি নেভির আগমন', 'id': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Naive Approach to Irony Detection', 'bs': 'KLUEnicorn na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 3: Naivni pristup detekciji Ironije', 'cs': 'KLUEnicorn na SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Naivní přístup k detekci ironie', 'ca': 'KLUEnicorn a SemEval-2018 Task 3: A Naive Approach to Irony Detection', 'et': 'KLUEnicorn SemEval-2018 ülesandel 3: naiivne lähenemine iroonia avastamisele', 'fi': 'KLUEnicorn SemEval-2018 Task 3: Naiivi lähestymistapa ironian havaitsemiseen', 'hy': 'ՍեմԷվալ 2018 թվականի 3-րդ հանձնարարությունը՝ Գափանձի հայտնաբերման նյարդային մոտեցումը', 'jv': 'KLUEnicarn nang seminval-2008 task 3: A Najve Method to irny detection', 'sk': 'KLUEnicorn na SemEval-2018 naloga 3: Naiven pristop k odkrivanju ironije', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'KLUEnicorn ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: גישה עלובה לגלות אירוניה', 'bo': 'KLUEnicorn at SemEval-2018 Task 3: a Naive Approach to Irony Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the KLUEnicorn system submitted to the SemEval-2018 task on Irony detection in English tweets. The proposed system uses a naive Bayes classifier to exploit rather simple lexical, pragmatical and semantical features as well as sentiment. It further takes a closer look at different adverb categories and named entities and factors in word-embedding information.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام KLUEnicorn المقدم إلى مهمة SemEval-2018 حول "اكتشاف السخرية في التغريدات الإنجليزية". يستخدم النظام المقترح مصنف بايز ساذجًا لاستغلال السمات المعجمية والبراغماتية والمعنوية البسيطة إلى حد ما بالإضافة إلى المشاعر. كما يلقي نظرة فاحصة على فئات الظرف المختلفة والكيانات والعوامل المسماة في معلومات تضمين الكلمات.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema Kluenicorn enviado a la tarea Semeval-2018 sobre «Detección de ironía en tuits en inglés». El sistema propuesto utiliza un clasificador Bayes ingenuo para explotar características léxicas, pragmáticas y semánticas bastante simples, así como el sentimiento. Además, analiza más de cerca las diferentes categorías de adverbios y las entidades con nombre y los factores en la información de incrustación de palabras.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système KlueNicorn soumis à la tâche SEMEval-2018 sur la «\xa0Détection de l'ironie dans les tweets anglais\xa0». Le système proposé utilise un classificateur bayésien naïf pour exploiter des caractéristiques lexicales, pragmatiques et sémantiques plutôt simples ainsi que des sentiments. Il examine également de plus près les différentes catégories d'adverbes et les entités nommées et les facteurs dans les informations d'incorporation de mots.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema KLUEnicorn submetido à tarefa SemEval-2018 sobre “Detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês”. O sistema proposto usa um classificador Bayes ingênuo para explorar características lexicais, pragmáticas e semânticas bastante simples, bem como sentimentos. Além disso, examina mais de perto as diferentes categorias de advérbios e entidades nomeadas e fatores nas informações de incorporação de palavras.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018の課題「英語ツイートにおけるイロニー検出」に提出されたKLUEnicornシステムについて説明する。提案されたシステムは、稚拙なベイズ分類器を使用して、感情だけでなく、かなり単純な語彙的、実用的、意味的特徴を利用します。さらに、さまざまな副詞カテゴリ、名前付きエンティティ、および単語埋め込み情報の要因を詳しく見ていきます。', 'zh': '本文述交SemEval-2018之KLUEnicorn统,语及"英语推讽刺检测"。 所建统用素贝叶斯类器用简词汇,语用与语义特徵及情。 更加研究了词嵌入信息中的不同副词类别和名实体和因缘。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर "अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाने" पर SemEval-2018 कार्य के लिए प्रस्तुत KLUEnicorn प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है। प्रस्तावित प्रणाली एक भोले Bayes क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करता है बल्कि सरल लेक्सिकल, व्यावहारिक और शब्दार्थ सुविधाओं के साथ-साथ भावनाओं का शोषण करने के लिए। यह आगे विभिन्न क्रियाविशेषण श्रेणियों और नामित संस्थाओं और शब्द-एम्बेडिंग जानकारी में कारकों पर एक करीबी नज़र डालता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система KLUEnicorn, представленная задаче SemEval-2018 «Обнаружение иронии в твитах на английском языке». Предлагаемая система использует наивный классификатор Байеса для использования довольно простых лексических, прагматических и семантических особенностей, а также настроений. Кроме того, в нем более подробно рассматриваются различные категории наречий и именованные сущности и факторы в информации о встраивании слов.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras KLUEnicorn a cuireadh isteach don tasc SemEval-2018 ar “Irony detection in English tweets”. Úsáideann an córas atá beartaithe aicmitheoir naive Bayes chun leas a bhaint as gnéithe simplí foclóireachta, pragmatach agus séimeantaice chomh maith le meon. Féachann sé freisin ar chatagóirí dobhriathar difriúla agus ar eintitis agus ar fhachtóirí ainmnithe i bhfaisnéis leabú focal.', 'ka': "ამ დოკუმენტის აღწერა KLUEnicorn სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval-2018 დავამუშავებული სამუშაოში 'ინგლისური ტივიტებში აღმოჩენა იპრონია'. პროგრამეტური სისტემის გამოყენება ნაირი ბეიზის კლასიფიკაციის გამოყენება, რომ გამოყენებს ძალიან ადგილური ლექსიკალური, პრაგმატიკალური და სმენტიკალური ფუნქ ეს უფრო მეტი უფრო მეტი აღმოჩნდება განსხვავებული ადბერბის კატეგორია და სახელი ინტერტიკები და ფაქტორი სიტყვების ინფორმაციაში.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα KLUEnicorn που υποβλήθηκε στο έργο SemEval-2018 με θέμα την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα αγγλικά tweets. Το προτεινόμενο σύστημα χρησιμοποιεί έναν αφελές ταξινομητή για να εκμεταλλευτεί αρκετά απλά λεξικά, πρακτικά και σημασιολογικά χαρακτηριστικά καθώς και συναισθήματα. Εξετάζει περαιτέρω τις διάφορες κατηγορίες επιθέσεων και τις ονομαστικές οντότητες και τους παράγοντες στις πληροφορίες ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 "Irónia felismerése angol tweetekben" című feladatra benyújtott KLUEnicorn rendszert. A javasolt rendszer egy naiv Bayes osztályozót használ, hogy kihasználja a meglehetősen egyszerű lexikai, pragmatikai és szemantikai jellemzőket, valamint az érzelmeket. Továbbá közelebbről megvizsgálja a különböző határozókategóriákat, valamint a megnevezett entitásokat és tényezőket a szóbeágyazott információkban.', 'kk': "Бұл қағаз KLUEnicorn жүйесін 'Ағылшынша tweets тізімдерінде ирония анықтау' деген half Eval- 2018 тапсырмасына жіберілген тапсырманы анықтайды. Келтірілген жүйеңіз қарапайым лексикалық, прагматикалық және семантикалық қасиеттерді және сезімсіздігін қолдану үшін наивды байс классификаторын қолданады. Бұл сөздерді ендіру мәліметінде аталған мақсаттарды және аталған мақсаттар мен факторларды жақындай қарады.", 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive il sistema KLUEnicorn presentato al compito SemEval-2018 su "Rilevamento dell\'ironia nei tweet inglesi". Il sistema proposto utilizza un ingenuo classificatore Bayes per sfruttare caratteristiche lessicali, pragmatiche e semantiche piuttosto semplici, così come il sentiment. Prende inoltre uno sguardo più da vicino alle diverse categorie di avverbi e alle entità nominate e ai fattori nelle informazioni di incorporazione di parole.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama KLUEnicorn sistema, pateikta SemEval-2018 uždaviniui „Ironijos aptikimas anglų kalba tweetuose“. Siūloma sistema naudoja naivų Bayes klasifikatorių, kad būtų galima panaudoti gana paprastas lexines, pragmatines ir semantines savybes bei jausmą. Be to, jame atidžiau nagrinėjamos įvairios priešiškos kategorijos ir pavadinti subjektai bei žodžių įtraukimo informacijos veiksniai.', 'mk': "This paper describes the KLUEnicorn system submitted to the SemEval-2018 task on 'Irony detection in English tweets'.  Предложениот систем користи наивен класификатор на Бејс за да ги искористи прилично едноставните лексикални, прагматични и семантични карактеристики, како и чувството. Покрај тоа, истата погледнува поблиску на различните категории на анбербите и именуваните ентитети и фактори во информациите за вклучување на зборови.", 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema KLUEnicorn sottomessa għall-kompitu SemEval-2018 dwar 'Detezzjoni tal-ironija fit-tweets Ingliż'. Is-sistema proposta tuża klassifikatur Bayes naiv biex tisfrutta karatteristiċi lexiċi, prammatiċi u semantiċi pjuttost sempliċi kif ukoll sentiment. Barra minn hekk, hija tħares aktar mill-qrib lejn kategoriji differenti ta’ avverb u entitajiet u fatturi msemmija fl-informazzjoni dwar l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem.", 'ml': "This paper describes the KLUEnicorn system submitted to the SemEval-2018 task on 'Irony detection in English tweets'.  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഒരു നീവ് ബെയ്സ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d,  വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്കും വാക്കുകളിലേക്കുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളെയും ഫാക്ടറുകളെയും കൂടുതല്\u200d നോക്കുന്നു.", 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem KLUEnicorn dihantar ke tugas SemEval-2018 pada 'Pengesanan Irony dalam tweet Inggeris'. Name Sistem yang diusulkan menggunakan klasifikasi Bayes naif untuk mengeksploitasi ciri-ciri leksikal, pragmatik dan semantik yang sederhana serta perasaan. Ia juga mengambil melihat lebih dekat kepada kategori adverb berbeza dan entiti dan faktor bernama dalam maklumat penyampaian perkataan.", 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver KLUEnicorn- systemet som er sendt til semiEval- 2018- oppgåva om «Ironioppdaging i engelske tweets». Systemet foreslått brukar ein naive Bayes-klassifisering for å ekspluatera ganske enkle leksiske, pragmatiske og semantiske funksjonar og sentiment. Det tar meir nærmere å sjå på ulike adverb- kategoriar og namnet einingar og faktorer i ord- innebygging- informasjon.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system KLUEnicorn zgłoszony do zadania SemEval-2018 "Wykrywanie ironii w angielskich tweetach". Proponowany system wykorzystuje naiwny klasyfikator Bayesa do wykorzystania dość prostych cech leksykalnych, pragmatycznych i semantycznych oraz sentymentów. Ponadto przygląda się bliżej różnym kategoriom przysłówek oraz nazwanym podmiotom i czynnikom w informacjach osadzających słowa.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul KLUEnicorn prezentat sarcinii SemEval-2018 privind "Detectarea ironiei în tweeturile în limba engleză". Sistemul propus folosește un clasificator naiv Bayes pentru a exploata caracteristicile lexicale, pragmatice și semantice destul de simple, precum și sentimentul. De asemenea, analizează mai atent diferitele categorii adverb și entități și factori denumiți în informațiile de încorporare a cuvintelor.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас KLUEnicorn системийг SemEval-2018 оны "Англи хэлний tweets дээр төмөр нээлттэй" гэсэн ажил дээр тайлбарладаг. Энэ санал өгсөн систем нь энгийн хэлбэрийн, прагматикийн, сэтгэл хөдлөлийг ашиглахад баатарлаг Бейс хэлбэрийг ашигладаг. Дараа нь өөр адал явдал категориудыг, нэрлэгдсэн бүтэц болон хүчин зүйлсийг илүү ойролцоогоор харах болно.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka KLUEnicorn ee loo soo dhiibay shaqada SemEval-2018 ee ku saabsan garsoorida ajaaniibta ee ku qoran Tweetka Ingiriiska. Isticmaalka la soo jeeday wuxuu isticmaalaa naïve Bayes oo si uu u isticmaalo alaab fudud oo lexic ah, pragmatika iyo semantical iyo fikrad. Intaas waxaa dheer looga fiiriyaa kooxo kala duduwan oo lagu magacaabaa macluumaad ku saabsan hadalka.', 'sr': "Ovaj papir opisuje KLUEnicorn sistem podignut na zadatak SemEval-2018 o 'detekciji željeza na engleskim tweetima'. Predloženi sistem koristi naivni klasifikator Bayes da iskoristi prilično jednostavne leksičke, pragmatične i semantičke karakteristike, kao i osjećaje. Dalje je potrebno bolje pogledati različite kategorije reklama i imenovane entitete i faktore u informacijama o uključenju reči.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver KLUEnicorn-systemet som lämnats in till SemEval-2018-uppgiften "Irony detection in English tweets". Det föreslagna systemet använder en naiv Bayes klassificerare för att utnyttja ganska enkla lexikala, pragmatiska och semantiska drag samt sentiment. Den tar vidare en närmare titt på olika adverbkategorier och namngivna entiteter och faktorer i ordinbäddande information.', 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ KLUEnicorn පද්ධතිය සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩකට 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් වල අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න' විස්තර කරනවා. ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශේෂකයෙක් භාවිත කරනවා සරල ලෙක්සික්, ප්\u200dරාග්මැටික් සහ සැමැන්තික අවශ ඒක තවත් වඩා වඩා වඩා වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවේශ විදියට බලන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශ කණ්ඩායම් වලින් නම් නම් ති", 'ta': "இந்த paper describes the KLUEnicorn system submitted to the SemEval- 2018 task on 'Ironin detection in English tweets'. பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு ஒரு நைவ் பேய் வகுப்பாளரை பயன்படுத்துகிறது மிகவும் எளிதான லெக்சியல், புதிர்வாக்கி மற்றும் அரைப் இது மேலும் வேறு விவார்ப்பு வகுப்புகள் மற்றும் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள்கள் மற்றும் வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் தகவலில் காரண", 'ur': "This paper describes the KLUEnicorn system submitted to the SemEval-2018 task on 'Irony detection in English tweets'. پیغمبر کی سیسٹم ایک نایوب بیز کلیسٹر کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ اسے بہت سادہ لکسیکل، پراگرماتیک اور سیمانٹیکل فکرات اور احساسات کا استعمال کرے۔ اس سے بھی زیادہ قریب تر نظر کرتا ہے کہ مختلف آب کارب کاٹیوں اور نام داروں اور فکتوروں کو کلمات میں جمع کرنے کی اطلاعات میں دیکھ لیتا ہے.", 'uz': "Bu sahifa ingliz twitlarida 'Iron aniqlash' vazifasi SemEval-2018'ga joʻnatilgan KLUEnicorn tizimini anglatadi. Taʼminlovchi tizim esa oddiy leksikal, pragmatikk va semantik xususiyatlarini va hissiyalarni ishlatadi. Koʻrib chiqish uchun boshqa adverb turlariga qarang va so'zlar ichki maʼlumotiga ega narsalar va faqatlarni ko'rib chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống KFrancis được gửi đến nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 về "Phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter". Hệ thống được đề nghị sử dụng một nhà phân loại người Bayis ngây thơ để sử dụng các tính chất ngôn ngữ đơn giản, thực dụng và ngữ pháp cũng như cảm xúc. Nó tiếp tục xem xét kỹ các loại phó từ khác nhau và các thực thể tên và các yếu tố trong thông tin ghép từ.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата на КЛУеникорн, подадена на задачата "Откриване на ирония в туитове на английски език". Предложената система използва наивен класификатор на Байс, за да експлоатира доста прости лексикални, прагматични и семантични особености, както и сентименти. Освен това той разглежда по-отблизо различните категории на рекламите и наименованите субекти и фактори в информацията за вграждане на думи.', 'hr': "Ovaj papir opisuje KLUEnicorn sustav podignut na zadatak semiEval-2018 o 'otkrivanju željeza na engleskim tweetima'. Predloženi sustav koristi naivni klasifikator Bayes da iskoristi prilično jednostavne leksičke, pragmatične i semantičke karakteristike, kao i osjećaje. Nadalje je bolje pogledati različite kategorije reklama i imenovane subjekte i faktore u informacijama o uključivanju riječi.", 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das KLUEnicorn-System, das an die SemEval-2018-Aufgabe "Ironie detection in English tweets" gestellt wurde. Das vorgeschlagene System nutzt einen naiven Bayes-Klassifikator, um eher einfache lexikalische, pragmatische und semantische Merkmale sowie Sentiment auszunutzen. Außerdem werden verschiedene Adverbkategorien sowie benannte Entitäten und Faktoren in Wort-Einbettungsinformationen genauer betrachtet.', 'nl': "Dit artikel beschrijft het KLUEnicorn systeem dat is ingediend bij de SemEval-2018 taak over 'Ironie detection in English tweets'. Het voorgestelde systeem maakt gebruik van een naïeve Bayes classificator om vrij eenvoudige lexicale, pragmatische en semantische kenmerken evenals sentiment te exploiteren. Verder wordt nader gekeken naar verschillende bijwoorden categorieën en benoemde entiteiten en factoren in woord-embedding informatie.", 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver KLUEnicorn-systemet, der blev indsendt til SemEval-2018-opgaven om 'Irony detection in English tweets'. Det foreslåede system bruger en naiv Bayes klassificering til at udnytte temmelig enkle leksikske, pragmatiske og semantiske træk samt sentiment. Det tager endvidere et nærmere kig på forskellige adverbkategorier og navngivne enheder og faktorer i ordindlejring information.", 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa KLUEnicorn uliotolewa kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 kuhusu 'Kugundua Ujerumani katika twiti za Kiingereza'. Mfumo huu unapendekezwa hutumia mwangazaji wa Bayes kwa kutumia vifaa rahisi zaidi vya lexico, mazingira na semantiki pamoja na hisia. It further takes a closer look at different adverb categories and named entities and factors in word-embedding information.", 'ko': "본고는SemEval-18'영어 트윗에서 반풍 검출'작업에 제출된KLUEnicorn시스템을 묘사한다.이 시스템은 소박한 베일러 분류기를 사용하여 상당히 간단한 어휘, 어용과 의미 특징, 감정을 이용한다.그것은 서로 다른 부사 유형과 단어가 정보에 삽입된 명명 실체와 요소를 더욱 깊이 연구했다.", 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem KLUEnicorn yang dihantar ke tugas SemEval-2018 pada 'Deteksi Ironi dalam tweet Inggris'. Tidak. Sistem yang diusulkan menggunakan klasifikasi Bayes naif untuk mengeksploitasi ciri-ciri lexik, pragmatis dan semantis sederhana serta sentimen. Hal ini mengambil lebih dekat melihat kategori adverb yang berbeda dan entitas bernama dan faktor dalam informasi penyampaian kata.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die KLUEnicorn stelsel wat na die SemEval- 2018 taak voorgestuur is op 'Irony beskrywing in Engels tweets'. Die voorgestelde stelsel gebruik 'n naive Bayes klassifiseerder om eerder eenvoudige leksiese, pragmatike en semantiese funksies en sentimente te eksplodeer. Dit neem verder 'n nader kyk na verskillende adverb kategories en genaamde entiteite en faktore in woord-inbêring inligting.", 'sq': "Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin KLUEnicorn të paraqitur në detyrën SemEval-2018 mbi 'zbulimin e ironisë në tweetet angleze'. Sistemi i propozuar përdor një klasifikues naiv Bayes për të shfrytëzuar karakteristika lexike, pragmatike dhe semantike si dhe ndjenja. Ajo merr më tepër një sy më të afërt në kategori të ndryshme adverb dhe njësi dhe faktorë të emëruar në informacionin e përfshirjes së fjalëve.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz KLUEnicorn sistemini SemEval-2018 'Iňlisçe tweetler bilen tapylýan täzelikleri' üçin bellenilýär. Mazmunlar sistemi saýlaw Baylar klassifikatçisini ýene bir lektik, pragmatik we semantik karakterlerden we duýgulamak üçin ullanýar. Diňe bir görnüş ad kategoriýasyna we adly zatlary we kelime daşarylýan maglumatynda faýllary daşarylýar.", 'hy': "This paper describes the KLUEnicorn system submitted to the SemEval-2018 task on 'Irony detection in English tweets'.  Պատրաստված համակարգը օգտագործում է նայիվ Բեյսի դասակարգչի օգտագործման համար բավականին պարզ լեքսիկական, պրագմատիկ և սեմանտիկ առանձնահատկություններ, ինչպես նաև զգացմունքներ: It further takes a closer look at different adverb categories and named entities and factors in word-embedding information.", 'az': "Bu kağıt KLUEnicorn sistemini 'İngilizce tweetlərdə Irony Detection' üçün SemEval-2018 işin ə göndəriləni təsbit edir. Tərsləndiyi sistem, sadəcə olaraq leksik, pragmatik və semantik özellikləri və duyguları istifadə etmək üçün naif Bayes klasifikatçısını istifadə edir. Daha çox daha yaxınlaşdırır, sözlər içərisində müxtəlif adverb kategoriyalarına, adlandırılmış entitələrə və faktörlərə.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች ላይ የኢሮኒያን አግኝቷል ለሚሰጡት የKLUEnicorn ስርዓት ሰብዓት ይናገራል፡፡ The proposed system uses a naive Bayes classifier to exploit rather simple lexical, pragmatical and semantical features as well as sentiment.  በተለየ የዓለም አዋጅ ክፍሎች እና የተባለው አካላት እና ውይይቶች በንግግር አካባቢ መረጃዎች ውስጥ ወደፊት ይታያል፡፡', 'bn': "এই পত্রিকাটির বর্ণনা করা হয়েছে কেলুইএনিকোর্ন ব্যবস্থা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজে প্রদান করা হয়েছে 'ইংরেজী টুইটে আইরোনি সন্ধান করা প্রস্তাবিত সিস্টেম বেয়েস ক্লাসিফার ব্যবহার করে সাধারণ লেক্সিক, প্রাগ্যামেন্টিক এবং সেমেন্টিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং আবে এটি আরো বিভিন্ন অ্যাডভার্ব বিভাগের দিকে আরো কাছাকাছি দেখা যায় এবং শব্দ বিভিন্ন তথ্যের নামে বিষয়বস্তু এবং ক", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém KLUEnicorn předložený k úkolu SemEval-2018 na téma "Detekce ironie v anglických tweetech". Navržený systém využívá naivní Bayesova klasifikátor k využití poměrně jednoduchých lexikálních, pragmatických a sémantických rysů a sentimentu. Dále se blíže podívá na různé kategorie příslovníků a pojmenované entity a faktory v informacích o vložení slova.', 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje KLUEnicorn sistem podignut na zadatak semiEval-2018 o 'detekciji željeza na engleskim tweetima'. Predloženi sistem koristi naivni klasifikator Bayes da iskoristi prilično jednostavne leksičke, pragmatične i semantičke karakteristike, kao i osjećaje. Dalje je potrebno bolje pogledati različite kategorije reklama i imenovane entitete i faktore u informacijama o uključenju riječi.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan KLUEnicorn-järjestelmää, joka on lähetetty SemEval-2018 tehtävään Irony detection in English tweets. Ehdotettu järjestelmä käyttää naiivia Bayes-luokitusta hyödyntääkseen melko yksinkertaisia sanastollisia, pragmaattisia ja semanttisia piirteitä sekä tunteita. Lisäksi siinä tarkastellaan tarkemmin eri adverbiluokkia ja nimettyjä kokonaisuuksia ja tekijöitä sanan upottamisessa.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse KLUEnicorni süsteemi, mis on esitatud SemEval-2018 ülesandele "Irony detection in English tweets". Kavandatud süsteem kasutab naiivset Bayesi klassifikaatorit, et kasutada üsna lihtsaid leksikaalseid, pragmaatilisi ja semantilisi omadusi ning tundeid. Lisaks analüüsitakse lähemalt erinevaid adverbide kategooriaid ning nimetatud olemeid ja tegureid sõna manustamise teabes.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم KLUEnicorn را توصیف می\u200cکند که به وظیفه\u200cی semiEval-2018 در مورد «شناسایی آهنی در tweets انگلیسی» ارسال شده است. این سیستم پیشنهاد برای استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی، پراگرماتیک و semantical و احساسات ساده استفاده می\u200cکند. به عنوان یک نگاهی نزدیک تر به گونه\u200cهای تبلیغات متفاوت و عنوان\u200cهای نامیده شده و عنوان\u200cها در اطلاعات وارد کردن کلمه\u200cها می\u200cشود.', 'ca': "This paper describes the KLUEnicorn system submitted to the SemEval-2018 task on 'Irony detection in English tweets'.  El sistema proposat utilitza un classificador naiu de Bayes per explotar característiques lècsiques, pragmàtiques i semàntiques i sentiments. També fa una ullada més atenta a diferents categories adverbs i entitats i factors anomenats en la informació d'incorporació de paraules.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכת KLUEnicorn שנשלחה למשימה SemEval-2018 על "גילוי אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים". המערכת המוצעת משתמשת במסגרת בייס נאיבית כדי לנצל תכונות לקסיות, פרגמטיות וסמנטיות פשוטות, כמו גם רגשות. הוא נוסף מסתכל מקרוב על קטגוריות שונות של פרטים ושמות ישויות וגורמים במידע של מילים.', 'jv': "Perintah iki rambarang kelas KLUEnik sistem sing nyimpen nang sampeyan seminval-2008 ning 'Ketokan kelas nang tuwit Inggris'. Sayensi Tulung luwih dumateng langgar sampeyan macer", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem KLUEnicorn, predložen nalogi SemEval-2018 z naslovom "Zaznavanje ironije v angleških tweetih". Predlagani sistem uporablja naiven Bayesov klasifikator za izkoriščanje precej preprostih leksikalnih, pragmatičnih in semantičnih značilnosti ter sentimentalnih značilnosti. Natančneje pregleduje različne kategorije oglasov ter imenovane entitete in dejavnike v informacijah za vključevanje besed.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana KLUEnicron na tsarin KLUEnicron da aka saka zuwa aikin the SemEV-2018 a kan 'Ciron gane na'in Ingiriya'.'... @ action: button Yana ƙara kallo zuwa ƙungiyoyi dabam-dabam da aka suna abubuwa da faktoren cikin tsarin da aka shigar da shi.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་KLUEnicorn་གི་མ་ལག་དེ་SemEval-2018་ལ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་naive Bayes་དམིགས་འཛིན་པའི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་ལས་སྟབས་བདེ་བོ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་ལས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་གྲངས་མིང་གི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་མིང་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་ཁང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་།'}
{'en': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'ar': 'YNU-HPCC في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: مجموعة نماذج الشبكة العصبية للكشف عن السخرية على تويتر', 'es': 'YNU-HPCC en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Ensamble de modelos de redes neuronales para la detección de ironía en Twitter', 'fr': "YNU-HPCC au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Modèles de réseaux de neurones d'ensemble pour la détection de l'ironie sur Twitter", 'pt': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'ja': 'YNU - HPCC at SemEval -2018 Task 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'zh': 'YNU-HPCC在SemEval-2018务3:Twitter刺集成神经网络', 'ru': 'YNU-HPCC на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Ансамбль нейросетевых моделей для обнаружения иронии в Twitter', 'hi': 'YNU-HPCC पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 3: चहचहाना पर विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए पहनावा तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल', 'ga': 'YNU-HPCC ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Samhlacha Líonra Néaracha Ensemble le haghaidh Braite Iarainn ar Twitter', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Neurális hálózati modellek összeállítása Irony Detection Twitteren', 'el': 'ΥNU-HPCC στο SemEval-2018 Εργασία 3: Σύνολο μοντέλων νευρωνικών δικτύων για την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στο Twitter', 'it': "YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemble modelli di rete neurali per il rilevamento dell'ironia su Twitter", 'kk': 'YNU', 'lt': 'YNU-HPCC per 2018 m. pusmetį 3 užduotis: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'mk': 'YNU-HPCC на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'mt': 'YNU-HPCC f’SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'ms': 'YNU-HPCC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Model Rangkaian Neural Ensemble untuk pengesan Irony pada Twitter', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3-ല്\u200d യുന്\u200dയൂ- ഹെപിസിസി: ഐറോനി ഡിറ്ററ്റീഷന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡ', 'mn': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'pl': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Zespół modeli sieci neuronowych do wykrywania ironii na Twitterze', 'no': 'YNU-HPCC på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'ro': 'YNU-HPCC la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Ansamblarea modelelor de rețea neurale pentru detectarea ironiei pe Twitter', 'sr': 'YNU-HPCC na semiEval-2018 Task 3: Uhvatljivi neuronski modeli mreže za detekciju željeza na Twitter', 'si': 'YNO-HPCC at semeval-2018 Job 3: Ensemble neural network Models for Ironic Detection on Twitter', 'sv': 'YNU-HPCC på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Ensembla neurala nätverksmodeller för Irony Detection på Twitter', 'so': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemable Neural Network Models for Finnish', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 3: Iron Detection for Ensemable Neural Network Models', 'ur': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Máy phát âm Ybây tại SemEvl-208 Task 3: Ensemble Neual NetModels for irony trinh thám trên Twitter', 'hr': 'YNU-HPCC na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 3: Uhvatljivi neuronski modeli mreže za detekciju željeza na Twitter-u', 'nl': 'YNU-HPCC op SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Ensemble Neural Network Modellen voor Ironie Detection op Twitter', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Ансамбулиране на модели на неврална мрежа за откриване на ирония в Туитър', 'da': 'YNU-HPCC på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Ensemble Neurale Netværksmodeller til Irony Detection på Twitter', 'de': 'YNU-HPCC bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Ensemble Neuronale Netzwerkmodelle zur Ironie Detektion auf Twitter', 'fa': 'YNU-HPCC در تابع نیم Eval-2018 تابع ۳: Models Neural Network Ensemble for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'id': 'YNU-HPCC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Ensemble Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'sw': 'YNU-HPCC katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Utawala wa Mtandao wa Kiuraia wa Kutambua Uchunguzi wa Uholanzi kwenye mtandao wa Twita', 'ko': 'YNU-HPCC가SemEval-2018에서의 임무 3: 트위터 반풍 검측의 집적 신경 네트워크 모형', 'tr': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Iron Detection on Twitter', 'af': 'YNU-HPCC by SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models vir Irony Detection on Twitter', 'am': 'ስራ 3', 'sq': 'YNU-HPCC në SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'az': "YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Twitter'da Irony Detection üçün Ensemble Neural Network Models", 'hy': 'YNH-ՀՊԿ-ը, 2018-ի «Սեմվալ» 3. հանձնարարությունը. Թվիթերում նյարդային ցանցի համակարգչային մոդելներ', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩-এ ইয়ানইউ-এইচপিসিসি: আইরোনি ডিটেক্টরের জন্য নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল', 'bs': 'YNU-HPCC na semiEval-2018 Task 3: Uhvatljivi neuronski modeli mreže za detekciju željeza na Twitter', 'cs': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Soubor modelů neuronových sítí pro detekci ironie na Twitteru', 'fi': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection Twitterissä', 'et': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2018 ülesandel 3: Neuraalse võrgu mudelid iroonia tuvastamiseks Twitteris', 'ca': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'jv': 'YNU', 'he': 'YNU-HPCC ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: Ensemble Networks Models for Irony Detection on Twitter', 'sk': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2018 naloga 3: Ensemble Nevral Network Models for Irony Detection na Twitterju', 'ha': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEV-2018 Tafiyar 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Iron Finding on Twitter', 'bo': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Ensemble Neural Network Models for Irony Detection on Twitter'}
{'en': 'This paper describe the system we proposed to participate the first year of Irony detection in English tweets competition. Previous works demonstrate that LSTMs models have achieved remarkable performance in natural language processing ; besides, combining multiple classification from various individual classifiers in general is more powerful than a single classification. In order to obtain more precision classification of irony detection, our system trained several individual neural network classifiers and combined their results according to the ensemble-learning algorithm.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام الذي اقترحناه للمشاركة في السنة الأولى من الكشف عن السخرية في مسابقة التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية. توضح الأعمال السابقة أن نماذج LSTM قد حققت أداءً رائعًا في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية ؛ إلى جانب ذلك ، فإن الجمع بين تصنيفات متعددة من مصنفات فردية مختلفة بشكل عام أقوى من تصنيف واحد. من أجل الحصول على تصنيف أكثر دقة لاكتشاف المفارقة ، قام نظامنا بتدريب العديد من مصنفات الشبكات العصبية الفردية وجمع نتائجها وفقًا لخوارزمية تعلم المجموعات.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système que nous avons proposé pour participer à la première année du concours Irony Detection in English Tweets. Des travaux antérieurs démontrent que les modèles LSTM ont obtenu des performances remarquables dans le traitement du langage naturel\xa0; en outre, la combinaison de classifications multiples provenant de divers classificateurs individuels est généralement plus efficace qu'une classification unique. Afin d'obtenir une classification plus précise de la détection de l'ironie, notre système a formé plusieurs classificateurs de réseaux neuronaux individuels et a combiné leurs résultats en fonction de l'algorithme d'apprentissage de l'ensemble.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema que propusemos para participar do primeiro ano de detecção de ironia na competição de tweets em inglês. Trabalhos anteriores demonstram que os modelos LSTMs alcançaram desempenho notável no processamento de linguagem natural; além disso, combinar várias classificações de vários classificadores individuais em geral é mais poderoso do que uma única classificação. Para obter uma classificação mais precisa da detecção de ironia, nosso sistema treinou vários classificadores de redes neurais individuais e combinou seus resultados de acordo com o algoritmo de aprendizado de conjunto.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema que propusimos para participar el primer año de la competencia de detección de ironía en tuits en inglés. Trabajos anteriores demuestran que los modelos LSTM han logrado un rendimiento notable en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural; además, combinar la clasificación múltiple de varios clasificadores individuales en general es más potente que una sola clasificación. Con el fin de obtener una clasificación más precisa de la detección de ironía, nuestro sistema entrenó a varios clasificadores de redes neuronales individuales y combinó sus resultados de acuerdo con el algoritmo de aprendizaje por conjuntos.', 'ja': '本稿では、英語のツイート競争において、アイロニー検出の初年度に参加するために提案したシステムについて述べる。これまでの研究は、LSTMモデルが自然言語処理において卓越したパフォーマンスを達成していることを示している。さらに、一般的に、様々な個々の分類子からの複数の分類を組み合わせることは、単一の分類よりも強力である。皮肉検出のより正確な分類を得るために、当社のシステムはいくつかの個々のニューラルネットワーク分類器を訓練し、それらの結果をアンサンブル学習アルゴリズムに従って組み合わせました。', 'zh': '本文述臣等议参第一年英语推文竞赛之刺检。 前之论明,LSTM形于自然语言而得显者也。 又诸单器之类,大于单类。 为得更精之刺检类,吾等统练数神经网络分类器,因集成算法而合之。', 'ru': 'Эта статья описывает систему, которую мы предложили принять участие в первом году обнаружения иронии в конкурсе английских твитов. Предыдущие работы показывают, что модели LSTM достигли замечательных результатов в обработке естественного языка; кроме того, объединение нескольких классификаций из различных отдельных классификаторов в целом является более мощным, чем одна классификация. Чтобы получить более точную классификацию обнаружения иронии, наша система обучила несколько отдельных классификаторов нейронных сетей и объединила их результаты по алгоритму ансамблевого обучения.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर उस प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है जिसे हमने अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स प्रतियोगिता में विडंबना का पता लगाने के पहले वर्ष में भाग लेने का प्रस्ताव दिया था। पिछले कार्यों से पता चलता है कि एलएसटीएम मॉडल ने प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में उल्लेखनीय प्रदर्शन हासिल किया है; इसके अलावा, सामान्य रूप से विभिन्न व्यक्तिगत क्लासिफायरों से कई वर्गीकरण का संयोजन एक एकल वर्गीकरण की तुलना में अधिक शक्तिशाली है। विडंबना का पता लगाने के अधिक सटीक वर्गीकरण को प्राप्त करने के लिए, हमारे सिस्टम ने कई व्यक्तिगत तंत्रिका नेटवर्क क्लासिफायरों को प्रशिक्षित किया और उनके परिणामों को पहनावा-सीखने के एल्गोरिथ्म के अनुसार जोड़ा।', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a bhí beartaithe againn chun páirt a ghlacadh sa chéad bhliain d’Irony detection i gcomórtas tweets Béarla. Léiríonn saothair roimhe seo go bhfuil feidhmíocht iontach bainte amach ag samhlacha LSTManna i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha; ina theannta sin, tá sé níos cumhachtaí ná aicmiú aonair a chomhcheangal le haicmiú iolraithe ó aicmithe aonair éagsúla i gcoitinne. D'fhonn rangú níos cruinne a fháil ar bhrath íoróin, chuir ár gcóras oiliúint ar roinnt aicmitheoirí líonra néarúla aonair agus chomhcheangail siad a gcuid torthaí de réir algartam foghlama an ensemble.", 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერა სისტემა, რომელიც ჩვენ მივიღეთ იპონის პირველი წლის განახლება ინგლისური tweets კონტენციაში. პირველი სამუშაო მუშაოებები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ LSTMs მოდელები მონაცემის შესაძლებელი პროცესის შესაძლებელობაში გააკეთებენ; დამატებით, რამდენიმე კლასიფიკაცია განსხვავებული ინდიველური კლასიფიკაციებიდან ერთადერთი კლასიფიკაციაზე უფრო ძალიან. ჩვენი სისტემა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ნეიროლური ქსელექტიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციას მივიღეთ, და ჩვენი სისტემა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ნეიროლური ქსელექტიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციას გა', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja azt a rendszert, amelyet az Irony Detection verseny első évében javasoltunk részt venni. Korábbi munkák azt mutatják, hogy az LSTMs modellek figyelemreméltó teljesítményt értek el a természetes nyelvfeldolgozásban; Emellett a különböző egyéni osztályozók többszörös osztályozásának kombinálása általában hatékonyabb, mint egyetlen osztályozás. Az irónia felismerésének pontosabb osztályozása érdekében rendszerünk több egyéni neurális hálózati osztályozót képzett ki, és eredményeiket az együttes-tanulási algoritmus szerint kombinálta.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema che abbiamo proposto per partecipare al primo anno di Irony detection in English tweets competition. Lavori precedenti dimostrano che i modelli LSTMs hanno raggiunto notevoli prestazioni nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale; Inoltre, combinare più classificazioni di vari singoli classificatori in generale è più potente di una singola classificazione. Al fine di ottenere una classificazione più precisa del rilevamento dell'ironia, il nostro sistema ha addestrato diversi classificatori di reti neurali individuali e combinato i loro risultati secondo l'algoritmo di ensemble-learning.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ағылшынша tweets конкурсында Иронияның бірінші жылын байқау жүйесін таңдайды. Алдыңғы жұмыс LSTMs үлгілері табиғи тілдерді өзгерту үшін белгілі жұмыс істейді. Бірақ бірнеше классификациялардан бірнеше классификацияларды біріктіру үшін бірнеше классификацияларды біріктіру үшін бір классификациялардан күшті. Иронияны анықтау үшін жүйеміз бірнеше невралдық желі классификацияларын оқыту үшін, оның нәтижелерін ensemble-learning алгоритміне сәйкес біріктіру үшін бірнеше невралдық желі классификаци', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama sistema, kurią pasiūlėme dalyvauti pirmaisiais Ironijos aptikimo metais anglų kalbos tweets konkurse. Ankstesni darbai rodo, kad LSTM modeliai pasiekė nemažai veiksmingų gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo rezultatų; be to, įvairių atskirų klasifikatorių klasifikacijos derinimas apskritai yra veiksmingesnis už vieną klasifikaciją. Siekiant tikslesnio ironijos aptikimo klasifikavimo, mūsų sistema apmokė keletą atskirų nervų tinklo klasifikatorių ir derino jų rezultatus pagal ensemble learning algoritmą.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που προτείναμε να συμμετάσχει στο πρώτο έτος της ανίχνευσης ειρωνείας στον διαγωνισμό Αγγλικών tweets. Προηγούμενες εργασίες αποδεικνύουν ότι τα μοντέλα έχουν επιτύχει αξιοσημείωτη απόδοση στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Εκτός αυτού, ο συνδυασμός πολλαπλής ταξινόμησης από διάφορους μεμονωμένους ταξινομητές γενικά είναι ισχυρότερος από μια ενιαία ταξινόμηση. Προκειμένου να επιτευχθεί πιο ακριβής ταξινόμηση της ανίχνευσης ειρωνείας, το σύστημά μας εκπαίδευσε διάφορους μεμονωμένους ταξινομητές νευρωνικών δικτύων και συνδύασε τα αποτελέσματά τους σύμφωνα με τον αλγόριθμο μάθησης συνόλου.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот кој го предложивме да учествува во првата година на детекција на Иронија на натпреварот на англиски твитови. Претходните дела демонстрираат дека моделите на ЛСТМС постигнаа извонредна резултат во природното обработување јазик; покрај тоа, комбинацијата на многуте класификации од различни индивидуални класификатори е помоќна од една класификација. За да добиеме попрецизна класификација на детекција на иронија, нашиот систем обучуваше неколку индивидуални класификатори на нервната мрежа и ги комбинираше нивните резултати според алгоритмот на ансембло-учење.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang kami cadangkan untuk berpartisipasi tahun pertama pengesan Irony dalam pertandingan tweet Inggeris. Kerja terdahulu menunjukkan bahawa model LSTMs telah mencapai prestasi yang luar biasa dalam pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi; selain itu, menggabungkan kelasukan berbilang dari pelbagai kelasukan individu secara umum lebih kuat daripada kelasukan tunggal. Untuk mendapatkan kelasukan lebih tepat pengesan ironi, sistem kami melatih beberapa kelasukan rangkaian saraf individu dan menggabungkan hasilnya mengikut algoritma pembelajaran ensemble.', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ട് പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്ന ആദ്യത്തെ വര്\u200dഷത്തില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാദോശിച മുമ്പ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d എല്\u200dഎസ്റ്റിഎസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d വളര വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗവിഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പല വിഭാഗങ്ങളെ കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനെക് പരിഹാസത്തിന്റെ പരിശോധനത്തിന്റെ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പല വ്യക്തിപരമായ നെറുറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് വിവ', 'mt': 'This paper describe the system we proposed to participate the first year of Irony detection in English tweets competition.  Xogħlijiet preċedenti juru li l-mudelli tal-LSTMs kisbu prestazzjoni notevoli fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali; barra minn hekk, il-kombinazzjoni ta’ klassifikazzjonijiet multipli minn diversi klassifikaturi individwali b’mod ġenerali hija aktar qawwija minn klassifikazzjoni waħda. Sabiex tinkiseb klassifikazzjoni aktar preċiża tad-detezzjoni tal-ironja, is-sistema tagħna ħarrġet diversi klassifikaturi individwali tan-netwerk newrali u kkombinaw ir-riżultati tagħhom skont l-algoritmu tat-tagħlim tal-ensemble.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний англи tweets өрсөлдөөнд иронийн анхны жил оролцохыг санал болгосон системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Өмнөх ажил нь LSTMs загварууд байгалийн хэл процесс дээр гайхалтай үйл ажиллагааг гаргасан гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ олон хэлбэрээс нэг хэлбэрээс илүү хүчирхэг. Инээд тодорхой хэлбэрийг олохын тулд бидний систем хэд хэдэн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний классификаторыг сургалтын тулд үр дүнг энземблийн суралцах алгоритмын тулд нэгтгэсэн.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vi foreslått å delta i den første året av Irony-oppdaging i konkurransen med engelsk tweets. Førre arbeidar viser at LSTMs-modeller har oppnådd merkelige utvikling i naturspråkshandsaming. I tillegg til at kombinasjonen av fleire klassifikasjonar frå ulike individuelle klassifikasjonar generelt er meir kraftig enn ei enkelt klassifikasjon. For å få meir nøyaktig klassifikasjon av ironisk oppdaging, opplærte systemet vårt fleire individuelle nøyralnettverksklassifikasjonar og kombinerte resultatene sine etter algoritmen for læring av ensemble.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system, który proponowaliśmy do udziału w pierwszym roku konkursu Irony detection w angielskich tweetach. Poprzednie prace pokazują, że modele LSTMs osiągnęły niezwykłą wydajność w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego; Poza tym, łączenie wielu klasyfikacji z różnych indywidualnych klasyfikatorów ogólnie jest potężniejsze niż jedna klasyfikacja. Aby uzyskać bardziej precyzyjną klasyfikację wykrywania ironii, nasz system przeszkoloł kilka indywidualnych klasyfikatorów sieci neuronowych i połączył ich wyniki zgodnie z algorytmem ensemble-learning.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul pe care l-am propus pentru a participa în primul an al competiției de detectare a ironiei în limba engleză tweets. Lucrările anterioare demonstrează că modelele LSTMs au obținut performanțe remarcabile în procesarea limbajului natural; În plus, combinarea clasificării multiple de la diferiți clasificatori individuali în general este mai puternică decât o singură clasificare. Pentru a obține o clasificare mai precisă a detectării ironiei, sistemul nostru a instruit mai mulți clasificatori individuali de rețele neurale și a combinat rezultatele lor conform algoritmului de învățare ansamblu.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් ප්\u200dරදේශයේ පළමු අවුරුද්දේ අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් අවුරුද් මුලින් වැඩේ පෙන්වන්නේ LSTMs මොඩේල් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස කරනවා කියලා; ඒ වගේම, විවිධ විශේෂකයෙන් විවිධ විශේෂකයෙන් විවිධ විශේෂකය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය විශ අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණයක් ලැබෙන්න, අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය විශේෂ විශේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශේෂකය කර', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu ku qoraa nidaamka aan ku talo galnay inuu ka qeybqaato sanadkii ugu horeysay aqoonsashada Ironimada oo ku qoran tartanka tweetka Ingiriiska. Previous works demonstrate that LSTMs models have achieved remarkable performance in natural language processing;  Isku xiriir, iskuulka kala duduwan ee kala duduwan oo kala duduwan waa ka xoog badan yihiin fasalka kaliya. Si aad u hesho fasax aad u sahlan oo caqli ah, nidaamkayaga ayaa tababariday qaar kale oo kala duduwan shabakadda neurada ah, wuxuuna ku soo bandhigay resultigooda si waafaqsan qoraalka waxbarashada.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem koji smo predložili da učestvujemo u prvoj godini detekcije Ironija na takmičenju engleskih tweeta. Prethodni radovi pokazuju da su modeli LSTMs postigli izvanrednu funkciju u procesu prirodnog jezika; Osim toga, kombinacija višestruke klasifikacije od različitih individualnih klasifikatora uopšte je moćnija od jednog klasifikacije. Da bi dobili precizniju klasifikaciju ironija, naš sistem je obučio nekoliko pojedinačnih klasifikatora neuronske mreže i kombinirao njihove rezultate prema algoritmu učenja ensembla.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver det system vi föreslog att delta i första året av Irony Detection i engelska tweets tävling. Tidigare arbeten visar att LSTMs modeller har uppnått anmärkningsvärda prestanda i naturlig språkbehandling; Dessutom är kombinationen av flera klassificeringar från olika enskilda klassificerare generellt effektivare än en enda klassificering. För att få en mer precisionsklassificering av ironidetektering tränade vårt system flera individuella neurala nätverksklassificerare och kombinerade deras resultat enligt ensemble-learning algoritmen.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை நாம் ஐரோனி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு முதல் ஆண்டு பகிர்ந்து கொள்ள நிறுவனத்தை விவரிக்கிறது ஆங்கிலத் முந்தைய வேலைகள் LSTMs மாதிரிகள் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் சிறப்பான செயல்பாடு பெற்றுள்ளது என்பதை காட் பொதுவான வகுப்பாளர்களில் இருந்து பல வகுப்புகளை ஒன்று சேர்த்தால் ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட வகுப்பாடுகளை விட சக்தியுடையது. மேலும் தெளிவான பிரிவினை பெறுவதற்கு, எங்கள் கணினி பல தனிப்பட்ட புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் வகுப்பாளர்', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ اس سیسٹم کی تعریف کرتی ہے جسے ہم نے پہلی سال انگلیسی ٹویٹ رقابت میں ایرونی شناسایی کا شریک کرنے کے لئے پیش کیا ہے۔ پہلے کے کام دکھاتے ہیں کہ LSTMs موڈل نے طبیعی زبان پردازش میں بہت اچھی فعالیت حاصل کی ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ بہت سی کلاسیفوں کو مختلف فریق کلاسیفوں سے جمع کرنا ایک کلاسیفوں سے زیادہ طاقتور ہے۔ اس لئے ہماری سیستم نے چند شخصی نائرول نیٹ ورک کلاسیر کی تعلیم دی اور ان کے نتیجے انسبل-یاد الگوریتم کے مطابق جمع کئے۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz biz Ironini aniqlash uchun birinchi yil ingliz tweeti xillikning birinchi ishlab chiqarishni anglatadi. Oldingi ishlarda LSTMs modellari asl tilni boshqarish uchun juda ajoyib bajarish natijasida bajarildi. Ko'pchilik bir necha darajalarni bir necha darajadagi bir necha darajalarni bir necha darajaga qo'yish mumkin. Ko'proq tashkilotni aniqlash uchun, bizning tizimmiz bir necha neyrolik tarmoqni taʼminlaydi va faqat o'rganish algoritga qanday natijalarini birlashtiradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống chúng tôi đề nghị tham gia năm đầu tiên khám phá sự mỉa mai trong cuộc thi trên Twitter của Anh. Những tác phẩm trước chứng minh rằng mô hình LSD đã đạt được hiệu quả đáng chú ý trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên; Hơn nữa, việc phân loại nhiều người phân loại khác nhau trong các phân loại khác nhau là hiệu lực hơn việc phân loại đơn lẻ. Để đạt được mức độ chính xác hơn về việc phát hiện mỉa mai, hệ thống của chúng tôi đã đào tạo ra nhiều chuyên gia phân loại mạng thần kinh và kết hợp kết quả theo thuật to án học chung.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav koji smo predložili sudjelovati u prvoj godini otkrivanja Ironija na natjecanju na engleskim tweets. Prethodni radovi pokazuju da su modeli LSTMs postigli izvanrednu učinku prirodnog obradivanja jezika; Osim toga, kombinacija višestruke klasifikacije iz različitih pojedinačnih klasifikatora općenito je moćnija od jednog klasifikacije. Da bi dobili precizniju klasifikaciju ironičkog otkrića, naš sustav je obučio nekoliko pojedinačnih klasifikatora neurone mreže i kombinirao njihove rezultate u skladu s algoritmom učenja ensembla.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver det system, vi foreslog at deltage i det første år af Irony Detection i engelsk tweets konkurrence. Tidligere arbejder viser, at LSTMs modeller har opnået bemærkelsesværdig ydeevne i naturlig sprogbehandling; Desuden er det mere effektivt at kombinere flere klassifikationer fra forskellige individuelle klassificerere generelt end en enkelt klassifikation. For at opnå en mere præcis klassificering af ironi detektion, vores system trænede flere individuelle neurale netværk klassificerere og kombinerede deres resultater i henhold til ensemble-learning algoritmen.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, която предложихме за участие в първата година на откриване на ирония в конкурса за туитове на английски език. Предишни работи демонстрират, че моделите са постигнали забележителни резултати в обработката на естествен език; Освен това комбинирането на многократна класификация от различни индивидуални класификатори като цяло е по-мощно от една класификация. За да се получи по-прецизна класификация на откриването на ирония, нашата система обучава няколко отделни класификатора на невронната мрежа и комбинира резултатите им според алгоритъма за ансамбъл-обучение.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het systeem dat we voorgesteld hebben om deel te nemen aan het eerste jaar van Irony detection in Engelse tweets competitie. Eerdere werken tonen aan dat LSTMs modellen opmerkelijke prestaties hebben bereikt in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal; Bovendien is het combineren van meerdere classificatie van verschillende individuele classificatoren in het algemeen krachtiger dan een enkele classificatie. Om een preciezere classificatie van ironie detectie te verkrijgen, trainde ons systeem verschillende individuele neurale netwerk classificatoren en combineerde hun resultaten volgens het ensemble-learning algoritme.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier beschreibt das System, das wir vorgeschlagen haben, am ersten Jahr der Irony Detection im englischen Tweets Wettbewerb teilzunehmen. Frühere Arbeiten zeigen, dass LSTMs-Modelle bemerkenswerte Leistungen in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache erzielt haben; Außerdem ist die Kombination mehrerer Klassifikationen aus verschiedenen Einzelklassifizierern im Allgemeinen leistungsfähiger als eine einzelne Klassifikation. Um eine genauere Klassifizierung der Ironie-Erkennung zu erhalten, trainierte unser System mehrere einzelne neuronale Netzwerk-Klassifikatoren und kombinierte ihre Ergebnisse nach dem Ensemble-Learning-Algorithmus.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را که پیشنهاد کردیم برای شرکت اولین سال کشف آیرونی در رقابت tweets انگلیسی توضیح می دهد. کارهای قبلی نشان می دهند که مدلهای LSTMs در پرداخت زبان طبیعی قابل تحصیل قابل تحصیل یافته اند. علاوه بر این، ترکیب گروه\u200cهای متعدد از گروه\u200cهای متعدد در کل قوی\u200cتر از یک گروه\u200cبندی است. برای دریافت کلیسازی دقیق بیشتری از شناسایی آهنگ، سیستم ما چندین کلیسازی شبکه عصبی شخصی را آموزش داد و نتیجه\u200cهایشان را بر اساس الگوریتم یادگیری غیرقابل تعلیم داد.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 제시한 영어 트위터 대회 참가 첫해 반어 검측 시스템을 묘사한다.기존의 연구에 의하면 LSTMs모델은 자연 언어 처리에 있어 현저한 효과를 거두었다.또한 여러 개의 단독 분류기 중의 여러 개의 분류를 조합하면 보통 한 개의 분류보다 더욱 효과적이다.더욱 정확한 반어 검출 분류를 얻기 위해 우리 시스템은 몇 개의 단독 신경 네트워크 분류기를 훈련시키고 집적 학습 알고리즘에 따라 그들의 결과를 조합했다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo tulioupendekeza kushiriki mwaka wa kwanza wa uchunguzi wa Ujerumani katika mashindano ya twiti za Kiingereza. Previous works demonstrate that LSTMs models have achieved remarkable performance in natural language processing;  Badala yake, kuunganisha darasa mbalimbali kutoka kwa watu tofauti kwa ujumla ni wenye nguvu zaidi ya kutangazwa kwa moja. Ili kupata ufafanuzi sahihi zaidi wa uchunguzi wa kejeli, mfumo wetu uliwafunza wataalamu kadhaa wa mitandao ya kijamii na kuunganisha matokeo yao kwa mujibu wa algorithi ya kujifunza.', 'id': 'This paper describe the system we proposed to participate the first year of Irony detection in English tweets competition.  Pekerjaan sebelumnya menunjukkan bahwa model LSTMs telah mencapai prestasi yang luar biasa dalam proses bahasa alam; selain itu, menggabungkan banyak klasifikasi dari berbagai klasifikasi individu secara umum lebih kuat dari satu klasifikasi. Untuk mendapatkan klasifikasi lebih tepat dari deteksi ironi, sistem kami melatih beberapa klasifikasi jaringan saraf individu dan menggabungkan hasilnya menurut algoritma ensemble-learning.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die stelsel wat ons voorgestel het om die eerste jaar van Irony-beskrywing in Engelske tweets-konkurransie te deel. Vorige werke wys dat LSTMs-modele betekende prestasie in natuurlike taal-prosessering bereik het; en behalwe, die kombinasie van veelvuldige klasifikasie van verskillende individuele klassifiseerders in algemeen is meer kragtige as 'n enkele klasifikasie. In order to obtain more precision classification of irony detection, our system trained several individual neural network classifiers and combined their results according to the ensemble-learning algorithm.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň teklip etdiğimiz sistemanyň iňlis tweets döwletlerinde birinji ýylda Irony tanyşynyň goşulmagyny tassyklaýar. Öňki işler LSTM nusgalarynyň tebigy dil işlemesinde örän möhüm taýýarlandygyny görkeýär; Mundan başga, birnäçe görkezilişi birnäçe görkezilişiklerden birleştirmek ýeke görkezilişimden has güýçlidir. Birnäçe dogry tapmak üçin, biziň sistemamyz birnäçe när şebek klasifikatçylaryny we netijelerini ensemble öwrenme algoritmä görä birleşdirdi.', 'hy': 'This paper describe the system we proposed to participate the first year of Irony detection in English tweets competition.  Previous works demonstrate that LSTMs models have achieved remarkable performance in natural language processing;  բացի դրանից, տարբեր անհատական դասակարգումների բազմաթիվ դասակարգումները ընդհանուր առմամբ ավելի ուժեղ է, քան մեկ դասակարգում: Երաժշտության հայտնաբերման ավելի ճշգրիտ դասակարգում ստանալու համար մեր համակարգը սովորեցրեց մի քանի անհատական նյարդային ցանցի դասակարգում և համադրեց նրանց արդյունքները ըստ էնսեմբուլ սովորելու ալգորիթմի:', 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan sistemin që propozuam për të marrë pjesë në vitin e parë të zbulimit të ironisë në konkurrimin e tweeteve angleze. Punët e mëparshme demonstrojnë se modelet LSTMs kanë arritur performancë të shquar në procesimin natyror të gjuhës; përveç kësaj, kombinimi i klasifikimeve të shumta nga klasifikuesit individual ë të ndryshëm në përgjithësi është më i fuqishëm se një klasifikim i vetëm. Për të marrë klasifikimin më të saktë të zbulimit të ironisë, sistemi ynë trajnoi disa klasifikues individual ë të rrjetit nervor dhe kombinoi rezultatet e tyre sipas algoritmit të mësimit të ensembleve.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ইংরেজী টুইট প্রতিযোগিতায় ইরোনি সনাক্তির প্রথম বছরে অংশগ্রহণের প্রস্তাব করা ব্যবস্থাটিকে বর্ণনা কর পূর্ববর্তী কাজ দেখাচ্ছে যে এলস্টিএমএস মডেল প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ায় চমৎকার কর্মকাণ্ড অর্জন করেছে; এছাড়াও, বিভিন্ন ব্যক্তিগত বিভিন্ন ব্যক্তিগত বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন শ্রেণীদের সাথে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ বেশী পরিস্থিতি সন্ধানের জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেম বেশ কিছু নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক বিভাগের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করেছে এবং এনএমবেল শিক্ষা অ্যালগরিদম অনুস', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem koji smo predložili da učestvujemo u prvoj godini otkrivanja Ironija na natjecanju engleskih tweets. Prethodni radovi pokazuju da su modeli LSTMs postigli izvanrednu funkciju u procesu prirodnog jezika; Osim toga, kombinacija višestruke klasifikacije iz različitih pojedinačnih klasifikatora općenito je moćnija od jednog klasifikacije. Da bi dobili precizniju klasifikaciju ironija, naš sistem je obučio nekoliko pojedinačnih klasifikatora neuronske mreže i kombinirao njihove rezultate prema algoritmu učenja ensembla.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የኢዮኖን መጀመሪያ ዓመት በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊት ተቃውሞ ለመጠቀም የምናስፈልገውን ስርዓት ይግለጻል፡፡ የቀድሞው ሥራ የLSTMs ሞዴላዎች በአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል የሚያስፈልጉት ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ብዙ ክፍለ ክፍል ከሁሉም በተለያዩ ክፍሎች ጋር ማሰናከል በአንድ ክፍል ይልቅ ብርቱ ነው፡፡ ለመግኘት የኢንተርናዊ ግለጽን ለማግኘት፣ ስርዓታችን ለብዙዎቹ የናዌር መረብ መግለጫዎችን አስተማርቷል፣ ፍሬዎቻቸውንም እንደተማርከው አሌጎርቲም አቀማቅሎታል፡፡', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém, který jsme navrhli pro účast prvního ročníku Irony detection v anglické tweetové soutěži. Předchozí práce ukazují, že modely LSTMs dosáhly pozoruhodného výkonu ve zpracování přirozeného jazyka; Kromě toho je kombinace více klasifikací z různých jednotlivých klasifikátorů obecně silnější než jedna klasifikace. Pro získání přesnější klasifikace detekce ironie náš systém vyškolil několik jednotlivých klasifikátorů neuronových sítí a kombinoval jejich výsledky podle algoritmu ensemble-learning.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldatakse süsteemi, mille me pakkusime osaleda esimesel aastal Irony avastamisel inglise tweets konkursil. Varasemad tööd näitavad, et LSTMde mudelid on saavutanud märkimisväärse jõudluse looduskeele töötlemisel; Lisaks on erinevate individuaalsete klassifikaatorite mitmekordse klassifikatsiooni kombineerimine üldiselt võimsam kui üks klassifikatsioon. Ironia tuvastamise täpsema klassifikatsiooni saamiseks koolitas meie süsteem mitmeid individuaalseid närvivõrgu klassifitseerijaid ja kombineeris nende tulemused vastavalt ansamble-õppe algoritmile.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema que vam proposar per participar en el primer any de detecció d'ironia en la competició anglesa de tweets. Previous works demonstrate that LSTMs models have achieved remarkable performance in natural language processing;  a més, combinar múltiples classificacions de diversos classificadors en general és més poderós que una sola classificació. Per aconseguir una classificació més precisa de la detecció d'ironia, el nostre sistema va entrenar diversos classificadors individuals de xarxa neural i va combinar els seus resultats segons l'algoritme d'aprenentatge conjunt.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt İngilizce tweets müharibəsində ilk il Ironya keşfetməsini təklif etdiyimiz sistemi təsdiq edir. Əvvəlki işlər LSTMs modellərinin doğal dil işləməsində möhtəşəm performansı başa düşdüyünü göstərir; Əksinə, müxtəlif individu klasifikatorlardan çoxlu klasifikasyonu birləşdirmək tək klasifikasiyadan daha qüvvətlidir. İroni tanıtmaq üçün sistemimiz birkaç nöral ağ klasifikatçısını təhsil etdi və sonuçlarını ensembli öyrənmə algoritmi sayəsində birləşdirdi.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmää, jonka ehdotimme osallistuvan Irony detection -kilpailun ensimmäiseen vuoteen. Aiemmat työt osoittavat, että LSTMs-mallit ovat saavuttaneet huomattavan suorituskyvyn luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä; Lisäksi usean luokituksen yhdistäminen eri luokittelijoista yleensä on tehokkaampaa kuin yksi luokitus. Jotta ironiantunnistuksen luokittelu olisi tarkempaa, järjestelmämme koulutti useita yksittäisiä neuroverkkoluokittelijoita ja yhdisti niiden tulokset ensemble-learning-algoritmin mukaisesti.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שהצענו להשתתף בשנה הראשונה של גילוי אירוניה בתחרות טוויטים אנגלית. העבודות הקודמות מראות שדוגמני LSTMs השיגו ביצועים מדהימים בעבודת שפת טבעית; besides, combining multiple classification from various individual classifiers in general is more powerful than a single classification.  כדי להשיג שיעור מדויק יותר לגילוי אירוניה, המערכת שלנו אימנה מספר שיעורי רשת עצבית בודדים ושלבה את התוצאות שלהם לפי אלגוריתם הלימוד של האנסמבל.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem, ki smo ga predlagali za sodelovanje prvega leta odkrivanja ironije na tekmovanju angleških tweetov. Prejšnja dela dokazujejo, da so modeli LSTMs dosegli izjemno zmogljivost pri obdelavi naravnega jezika; Poleg tega je kombinacija večkratne klasifikacije različnih posameznih klasifikacijskih elementov na splošno močnejša od ene klasifikacije. Da bi pridobili natančnejšo klasifikacijo odkrivanja ironije, je naš sistem usposobil več individualnih razvrščevalcev nevronskih omrežij in združil njihove rezultate v skladu z algoritmom ensemble-learning.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé punika nglarang sistem sing awakdhéwé nggawe ngubah tanggal tualke perusahaan winih dhéwé nang tatara éntuk bitis Inggris. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasai mèhku bakal ning model SLT M kuwi wis ngerasah efet karo perusahaan anyar nglanggar idisa anyar; politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana shi na'urar tsarin da muka buɗa'a ta farkon shekara na Iron da aka gane shi cikin tarjima na'urar Ingiriya. Yin aikin da ya gabãta ya nuna cewa misalin LTRM sun sami aikin mai girma a cikin jarraba harshen; Babu, kuma ya haɗi darafõji masu yawa daga darajõji guda guda, mafiya ƙarfi ne daga daraja guda. To, dõmin ya sami fassarar fassarar abin da yake bayani, na'uranmu ya sanar da wasu dangannaire masu tarayyan na neural, kuma ya sami matsalarsu da mujiban algoritin da aka sanar da shi na fanemble.", 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་སྔོན་ལ་ཨིན་ཡིག་གི་འགྱུར་བར་གྱི་ལོ་རྣམ་དང་པོ་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་རྒྱུ་དང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་དག་དེབ་སྔོན་ལྟར་ན། LSTMs་དཔེ་གཞུང་གིས་natural སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བརྟན་བཀོད་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཚད དམིགས་བསལ་ན། དབྱེ་རིགས་སོ་སོ་སོ་སོའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བསྡུར་བ་རེད། དབྱེ་རིག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་ཇེ་མང་ཙམ་རྙེད་དགོས་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་སྒེར་གྱི་མཐུད་སྣ་གྲངས་དབྱེ་བ་རྣམས་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་ར'}
{'en': 'Binarizer at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Parsing dependency and deep learning for irony detection', 'ar': 'Binarizer في SemEval-2018 Task 3: تحليل التبعية والتعلم العميق للكشف عن المفارقة', 'pt': 'Binarizer no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Análise de dependência e aprendizado profundo para detecção de ironia', 'es': 'Binarizer en SemEval-2018 Tarea 3: Análisis de la dependencia y el aprendizaje profundo para la detección de ironía', 'fr': "Binarizer au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Analyse de la dépendance et du deep learning pour la détection de l'ironie", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のバイナリライザータスク3 ：皮肉検出のための依存関係の解析とディープラーニング', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018 务 3 二折化器:解析恃深学以讽刺性检', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर Binarizer: विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए निर्भरता और गहरी शिक्षा पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Бинаризатор на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Анализ зависимости и глубокого обучения для обнаружения иронии', 'ga': 'Binarizer ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Spleáchas agus foghlaim dhomhain a pharsáil chun íoróin a bhrath', 'hu': 'Binarizer a SemEval-2018 3. feladat: Függőség és mélytanulás értelmezése az irónia felismeréséhez', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανάλυση εξάρτησης και βαθιάς μάθησης για την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας', 'ka': 'ბინარიზერი SemEval-2018 სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო: დამხმარება და ძალიან სწავლება იპონიის განვიხმარებისთვის', 'it': "Binarizer a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Analisi della dipendenza e del deep learning per il rilevamento dell'ironia", 'kk': 'SemEval-2018 тапсырмасының бинаризаторы 3- тапсырмасы: Ирония анықтау үшін тәуелдікті талдау және түсінікті оқыту', 'mk': 'Бинаризатор на SemEval-2018 задача 3: Анализирање на зависноста и длабоко учење за детекција на иронија', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3- ലെ ബിനാരിസര്\u200d: പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതും പരിഹസിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠ', 'ms': 'Binarizer di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Menghurai dependensi dan belajar dalam untuk pengesan ironi', 'no': 'Binarizer ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Tolking av avhengighet og dyp læring for ironisk oppdaging', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Харин гайхалтай ойлголтын тулд хамааралтай, гүн гүнзгий суралцах', 'mt': 'Binarizzatur f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 3: Analiżi tad-dipendenza u tagħlim profond għad-detezzjoni tal-ironja', 'pl': 'Zadanie 3: Analiza zależności i głębokiego uczenia w celu wykrywania ironii', 'sr': 'Binarizer na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Očitanje zavisnosti i duboko učenje za ironičko otkrivanje', 'ro': 'Binarizer la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 3: Analizarea dependenței și învățarea profundă pentru detectarea ironiei', 'lt': '3 užduotis: priklausomybės analizė ir gilus mokymasis ironijos nustatymui', 'si': 'බිනාරිසර් සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 3: විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Binarizer oo ku qoran SemEval-2018 Shaqada 3: Badbaadada ku xiran iyo waxbarashada aad u dheer oo la xiriira fikradda', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 3- ல் பினாரிசர்: பாசம் சார்ந்த சார்பு மற்றும் ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் ஆழமான கற்றல்', 'sv': 'Binarizer på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Tolkning av beroende och djupinlärning för att upptäcka ironi', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 ٹاکس 3 میں بیناریزر: ایرونی شناخت کے لئے اعتباری اور عمیق تعلیم پارچ کرنا', 'uz': 'SemEval-2018 Vazifa 3- yilda Binarizer', 'vi': 'Binarizer at SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 3: Parsons lệ thuộc và tìm hiểu sâu để phát hiện sự trớ trêu.', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Анализиране на зависимостта и дълбокото учене за откриване на ирония', 'nl': 'Binarizer bij SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Parsen van afhankelijkheid en deep learning voor ironie detectie', 'da': 'Binarizer på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Tolkning af afhængighed og dyb læring til påvisning af ironi', 'de': 'Binarizer bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Analyse von Abhängigkeiten und Deep Learning zur Ironie-Erkennung', 'hr': 'Binarizer na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Očitanje zavisnosti i duboko učenje za ironičko otkrivanje', 'id': 'Binarizer di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Menganalisis dependensi dan belajar dalam untuk deteksi ironi', 'sw': 'Binarizer katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 3: Kutegemea na kujifunza kwa uzoefu wa kejeli', 'fa': 'Binarizer at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Parsing dependency and deep learning for irony detection', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 임무 3: 반어를 감지하기 위한 의존 관계 분석 및 딥러닝', 'af': 'Binarizer by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 3: Ontleiding afhanklikheid en diep leer vir ironiese beskrywing', 'tr': 'SemEval-2018 Görev 3: Taýýarlama maglumaty we gysgynly öwrenme üçin', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: İroni keşfetmək üçün bağımlılıq və derin öyrənmək', 'sq': 'Binarizer në SemEval-2018 Task 3: Analizimi i varësisë dhe mësimi i thellë për zbulimin e ironisë', 'am': 'የሳምEval-2018 ስራ 3', 'hy': 'Երկրորդ գործընթացը ՍեմԷվալ-2018-ի 3. հանձնարարություն. կախվածության վերլուծությունը և խորը սովորելը հեղինակության հայտնաբերման համար', 'ca': 'Binaritzador a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Analysing dependency and deep learning for irony detection', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩-এ বিনারিজার: পার্সিং নির্ভরশীল এবং গভীর শিক্ষা পরীক্ষার জন্য গভীর শিক্ষা', 'fi': 'Binarizer SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Riippuvuuden ja syväoppimisen analysointi ironian havaitsemiseksi', 'et': 'Binarizer SemEval-2018 ülesanne 3: sõltuvuse ja sügavõppe parsimine iroonia tuvastamiseks', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Analýza závislosti a hlubokého učení pro detekci ironie', 'bs': 'Binarizer na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: Očitanje zavisnosti i duboko učenje za ironičko otkrivanje', 'sk': 'Binarizer na SemEval-2018 Naloga 3: Razčlenitev odvisnosti in globokega učenja za odkrivanje ironije', 'jv': 'Workspace 3', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'he': 'בינאריזר ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: בדיקת תלויה עמוקה לגילוי אירוניה', 'bo': 'Binarizer at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Parsing dependency and deep learning for irony detection'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe the system submitted for the SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) Subtask A by the team Binarizer. Irony detection is a key task for many natural language processing works. Our method treats ironical tweets to consist of smaller parts containing different emotions. We break down tweets into separate phrases using a dependency parser. We then embed those phrases using an LSTM-based neural network model which is pre-trained to predict emoticons for tweets. Finally, we train a fully-connected network to achieve classification.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف النظام المقدم لمهمة SemEval 2018 3 (الكشف عن المفارقة في التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية) Subtask A بواسطة فريق Binarizer. يعد اكتشاف المفارقة مهمة أساسية للعديد من أعمال معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. تتعامل طريقتنا مع التغريدات الساخرة بحيث تتكون من أجزاء أصغر تحتوي على مشاعر مختلفة. نقسم التغريدات إلى عبارات منفصلة باستخدام محلل التبعية. ثم نقوم بتضمين هذه العبارات باستخدام نموذج الشبكة العصبية القائم على LSTM والذي تم تدريبه مسبقًا للتنبؤ بالرموز التعبيرية للتغريدات. أخيرًا ، نقوم بتدريب شبكة متصلة بالكامل لتحقيق التصنيف.', 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos el sistema enviado para la Subtarea A de la Tarea 3 de SemEval 2018 (Detección de ironía en tuits en inglés) por el equipo Binarizer. La detección de ironía es una tarea clave para muchos trabajos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Nuestro método trata los tuits irónicos para que consten de partes más pequeñas que contienen diferentes emociones. Dividimos los tuits en frases separadas mediante un analizador de dependencias. Luego incorporamos esas frases utilizando un modelo de red neuronal basado en LSTM que está preentrenado para predecir emoticonos para tuits. Por último, entrenamos una red totalmente conectada para lograr la clasificación.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons le système soumis pour la sous-tâche A de la tâche 3 de SemEval 2018 (détection de l'ironie dans les tweets anglais) par l'équipe Binarizer. La détection de l'ironie est une tâche essentielle pour de nombreux travaux de traitement du langage naturel. Notre méthode traite les tweets ironiques comme des parties plus petites contenant différentes émotions. Nous divisons les tweets en phrases distinctes à l'aide d'un analyseur de dépendances. Nous intégrons ensuite ces phrases à l'aide d'un modèle de réseau de neurones basé sur LSTM qui est pré-entraîné pour prédire les émoticônes pour les tweets. Enfin, nous formons un réseau entièrement connecté pour atteindre la classification.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos o sistema enviado para a Subtarefa A do SemEval 2018 Task 3 (detecção de ironia em tweets em inglês) pela equipe Binarizer. A detecção de ironia é uma tarefa fundamental para muitos trabalhos de processamento de linguagem natural. Nosso método trata tweets irônicos para consistir em partes menores contendo emoções diferentes. Dividimos os tweets em frases separadas usando um analisador de dependência. Em seguida, incorporamos essas frases usando um modelo de rede neural baseado em LSTM que é pré-treinado para prever emoticons para tweets. Por fim, treinamos uma rede totalmente conectada para alcançar a classificação.', 'ja': '本稿では、BinarizerチームがSemEval 2018 Task 3 （英語ツイートでのアイロニー検出） Subtask Aのために提出したシステムについて説明する。アイロニー検出は、多くの自然言語処理作業にとって重要なタスクです。私たちの方法は、皮肉なツイートを、異なる感情を含む小さな部分で構成するように扱います。依存関係解析器を使用して、ツイートを別々のフレーズに分解します。そして、ツイートのエモコンを予測するために事前にトレーニングされたLSTMベースのニューラルネットワークモデルを使用して、これらのフレーズを埋め込みます。最後に、完全に接続されたネットワークをトレーニングして、分類を達成します。', 'zh': '本文中,述Binarizer团队交SemEval 2018 Task 3(英语推讽刺性检)子职A之统。 刺检者,众自然语言之要务也。 吾法以刺推文为小分。 用赖解析器将推文分解为独短语。 然后嵌之于LSTM神经网络短语,先练以占推文表情符号。 最后,我们训练一个全接的网络以成分类。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम टीम Binarizer द्वारा SemEval 2018 टास्क 3 (अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाने) Subtask A के लिए प्रस्तुत सिस्टम का वर्णन करते हैं। विडंबना का पता लगाना कई प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। हमारी विधि विभिन्न भावनाओं वाले छोटे भागों से मिलकर विडंबनापूर्ण ट्वीट्स का इलाज करती है। हम एक निर्भरता पार्सर का उपयोग करके अलग-अलग वाक्यांशों में ट्वीट्स को तोड़ते हैं। फिर हम एक एलएसटीएम-आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल का उपयोग करके उन वाक्यांशों को एम्बेड करते हैं जो ट्वीट्स के लिए इमोटिकॉन्स की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित है। अंत में, हम वर्गीकरण प्राप्त करने के लिए पूरी तरह से जुड़े नेटवर्क को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем систему, представленную для задачи 3 SemEval 2018 (обнаружение иронии в твитах на английском языке) Подзадача A командой Binarizer. Обнаружение иронии является ключевой задачей для многих работ по обработке естественного языка. Наш метод относится к ироничным твитам, чтобы состоять из меньших частей, содержащих различные эмоции. Мы разбиваем твиты на отдельные фразы с помощью анализатора зависимостей. Затем мы внедрили эти фразы, используя модель нейронной сети на основе LSTM, которая предварительно обучена предсказывать смайлики для твитов. Наконец, мы обучаем полностью подключенную сеть для достижения классификации.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar an gcóras a cuireadh isteach le haghaidh Tasc 3 SemEval 2018 (Brath íoróin i tweets Béarla) Fothasc A ag an bhfoireann Binarizer. Is príomhthasc é brath íoróin do go leor oibreacha próiseála teanga nádúrtha. Déileálann ár modh le tweets ironical comhdhéanta de chodanna níos lú ina bhfuil mothúcháin éagsúla. Briseann muid síos tweets ina frásaí ar leith ag baint úsáide as parsálaí spleáchais. Leabaímid na frásaí sin ansin ag baint úsáide as samhail líonra néareolaíoch bunaithe ar LSTM atá réamh-oilte chun straoiseoga a thuar le haghaidh tweets. Ar deireadh, déanaimid oiliúint ar líonra lán-nasctha chun aicmiú a bhaint amach.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a Binarizer csapat által a SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) A alcsoportra benyújtott rendszert. Az irónia felismerése számos természetes nyelvfeldolgozási munka kulcsfontosságú feladata. Módszerünk úgy kezeli az ironikus tweeteket, hogy kisebb részekből álljanak, amelyek különböző érzelmeket tartalmaznak. A tweeteket külön kifejezésekre bontjuk, függőség elemzővel. Ezután beágyazzuk ezeket a kifejezéseket egy LSTM-alapú neurális hálózati modell segítségével, amely előre kiképzett arra, hogy megjósolja a hangulatjeleket tweetekhez. Végül egy teljesen összekapcsolt hálózatot képzünk a besorolás eléréséhez.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, περιγράφουμε το σύστημα που υποβλήθηκε για την εργασία 3 (ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα αγγλικά tweets) Υποεργασία Α από την ομάδα Μπιναριζέρ. Η ανίχνευση ειρωνείας είναι ένα βασικό έργο για πολλές εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Η μέθοδος μας αντιμετωπίζει τα ειρωνικά tweets να αποτελούνται από μικρότερα μέρη που περιέχουν διαφορετικά συναισθήματα. Χωρίζουμε τα tweets σε ξεχωριστές φράσεις χρησιμοποιώντας έναν αναλυτή εξάρτησης. Στη συνέχεια ενσωματώνουμε αυτές τις φράσεις χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου βασισμένο στο το οποίο είναι προ-εκπαιδευμένο για να προβλέψει emoticons για tweets. Τέλος, εκπαιδεύουμε ένα πλήρως συνδεδεμένο δίκτυο για την επίτευξη ταξινόμησης.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენში ჩვენ შევწერეთ სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval 2018 დავალებისთვის სამუშაო დავალების სამუშაო დავალების სამუშაო (ინგლისური tweets) A-ის სამუშაო დავალება ბინარი აირონის განსახულება - ბევრი ნაირადი ენის პროცესის მუშაობისთვის გასაღები. ჩვენი მეთოდი იპონიკალური ტივიტების გამოყენება, რომელიც ცოტა ნაკლები ემოციონებისგან არსებობს. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ტივიტები სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვად შემდეგ ჩვენ ამ ფრაზების შეყვარებით LSTM-ის ნაწილი ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელის გამოყენებით, რომელიც სანაწილად განვიცემებით ემოტიკონები Tweets-ისთვის. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ უფრო დაკავშირებული ქსელი გაგრძნობით, რომ კლასიფიკაციას მიიღებთ.', 'it': "In questo articolo, descriviamo il sistema presentato per SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweet) Subtask A dal team Binarizer. Il rilevamento dell'ironia è un compito chiave per molti lavori di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Il nostro metodo tratta i tweet ironici per consistere in parti più piccole contenenti emozioni diverse. Ripartiamo i tweet in frasi separate usando un parser di dipendenza. Incorporamo quindi queste frasi utilizzando un modello di rete neurale basato su LSTM che è pre-addestrato per predire emoticon per i tweet. Infine, addestriamo una rete completamente connessa per ottenere la classificazione.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз 2018 жылдағы 3- тапсырма үшін жүйені (ағылшын tweets тізімінде иронияны анықтау) A- тапсырмасын Binarizer тобы арқылы тапсырмаларды анықтаймыз. Ирония анықтау - табиғи тілдерді өңдеу жұмысының кілтті тапсырмасы. Біздің әдіміміз айырмашылық емоциялары бар кішкентай бөліктерінен тұрады. Твиттерді тәуелдік талдағышымен бөлек сөздерге бөліп тастаймыз. Содан кейін бұл сөздерді LSTM негіздеген неврал желі үлгісімен ендіреміз. Бұл көңіл көңіл белгілерді tweets үшін алдын- ала оқылған. Соңғы сәтте, біз сәйкес істеу үшін толық қосылған желі үйренеміз.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar untuk SemEval 2018 Task 3 (pengesan ironi dalam tweet Inggeris) Subtask A oleh pasukan Binarizer. Pengesanan ironi adalah tugas utama untuk banyak kerja pemprosesan bahasa alami. Our method treats ironical tweets to consist of smaller parts containing different emotions.  Kami pecahkan tweet kepada frasa terpisah menggunakan penghurai dependensi. Kemudian kami memasukkan frasa-frasa itu menggunakan model rangkaian saraf berdasarkan LSTM yang dilatih-dilatih untuk meramalkan emotikon untuk tweet. Akhirnya, kita melatih rangkaian yang tersambung sepenuhnya untuk mencapai klasifikasi.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, го опишуваме системот поднесен за SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Ирониска детекција на англиски твитови) Subtask A од тимот Бинаризер. Детектирањето на иронијата е клучна задача за многу природни процеси на јазик. Нашиот метод ги третира ироничните твитови кои се состојат од помали делови кои содржат различни емоции. Ги разделуваме твитовите во одделни фрази користејќи анализатор на зависност. Потоа ги вградивме тие фрази користејќи модел на нервна мрежа базиран на LSTM кој е предобучен да предвидува емотикони за твитови. Конечно, тренираме целосно поврзана мрежа за да постигнеме класификација.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3 (ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഐറോനി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത്) ടീം ബിനാരിസെരില്\u200d നിന്നും സി ഐറോണി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു താക്കോലാണ്. നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വികാരങ്ങളുള്ള ചെറിയ ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉള്ള ചെറിയ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്താന്\u200d  ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വാക്കുകളായി തകര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ആ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ലെസ്റ്റിംഎം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ശൃംഖലം പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രാപ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид 2018 оны SemEval Task 3-д тайлбарласан системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Байгалийн хэл боловсруулах ажлын түлхүүр ажил юм. Бидний арга нь өөр сэтгэл хөдлөлөөтэй жижиг хэсэгт байдаг гайхамшигтай tweets гэдэг. Бид tweets-г хамааралтай хуваалцагчийг ашиглан ялгаатай үг рүү хувааж байна. Тэгээд бид LSTM-д суурилсан мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар ашиглан тэдгээр үгсийг бичсэн. Энэ нь өмнө сургалтын хөдөлгөөн тууйтуудын сэтгэл хөдлөлийг таамаглах боломжтой. Эцэст нь бид бүрэн холбогдсон сүлжээг хуваалцааныг хүргэхэд суралцаж байна.', 'mt': 'In this paper, we describe the system submitted for the SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) Subtask A by the team Binarizer.  L-iskoperta tal-ironja hija kompitu ewlieni għal ħafna xogħlijiet ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Il-metodu tagħna jittratta tweets ironiċi biex jikkonsistu f’partijiet iżgħar li fihom emozzjonijiet differenti. Aħna nqasmu t-tweets fi frażijiet separati bl-użu ta’ analizzatur tad-dipendenza. Imbagħad inkorporajna dawk il-frażijiet bl-użu ta’ mudell tan-netwerk newrali bbażat fuq LSTM li huwa mħarreġ minn qabel biex jipprevedi emoticons għal tweets. Fl-a ħħar nett, aħna nħarrġu netwerk kompletament konness biex niksbu klassifikazzjoni.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi systemet som er sendt til den halvEval 2018 oppgåva 3 (Irony Detection in English tweets) Subtask A av team Binarizer. Ironioppdaging er ein nøkkeloppgåve for mange naturlege språkprocessingar. Metoden vårt behandler ironiske tweeter som inneheld mindre deler som inneheld ulike følelser. Vi deler tweeter inn i separate fraser med ein avhengighetstolkar. Vi innebygger desse frasene derfor med eit LSTM-basert neuralnettverksmodell som er føretrent for å foregå førehandsvising av førehandsvisingar for tweets. I slutt treng vi eit fullstendig tilkopla nettverk for å oppnå klassifikasjon.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname sistemą, pateiktą komandos „Binarizer“ 3 uždaviniui „SemEval 2018“ atlikti. Ironijos aptikimas yra pagrindinė daugelio gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo darbų užduotis. Mūsų metodas apdoroja ironinius tweetus, kuriuos sudaro mažesnės dalys, kuriose yra skirtingų emocijų. Mes suskirstome tweetus į atskiras frazes naudojant priklausomybės analizatorių. Tada įterpėme šias frazes naudojant LSTM pagrįstą neurologinio tinklo model į, kuris yra iš anksto parengtas prognozuoti emotikonas tweetams. Galiausiai rengiame visiškai sujungtą tinklą klasifikacijai pasiekti.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy system zgłoszony do SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) Podzadanie A przez zespół Binarizer. Wykrywanie ironii jest kluczowym zadaniem dla wielu prac przetwarzania języka naturalnego. W naszej metodzie ironiczne tweety składają się z mniejszych części zawierających różne emocje. Podzielamy tweety na osobne frazy za pomocą parsera zależności. Następnie osadzamy te frazy za pomocą modelu sieci neuronowej opartego na LSTM, który jest wstępnie przeszkolony do przewidywania emotikonów dla tweetów. Wreszcie szkolimy w pełni połączoną sieć w celu uzyskania klasyfikacji.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem sistemul depus pentru SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Detectarea ironiei în tweet-uri în limba engleză) Subsarcina A de echipa Binarizer. Detectarea ironiei este o sarcină cheie pentru multe lucrări de procesare a limbajului natural. Metoda noastră tratează tweeturile ironice ca fiind compuse din părți mai mici care conțin emoții diferite. Împărțim tweeturile în fraze separate folosind un parser de dependență. Apoi încorporăm aceste fraze folosind un model de rețea neurală bazat pe LSTM, care este pre-antrenat pentru a prezice emoticoanele pentru tweet-uri. În cele din urmă, pregătim o rețea complet conectată pentru a obține clasificarea.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තට, අපි පද්ධතිය විවෘත කරන්නේ සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩ 3 (ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් වල අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න) කාණ්ඩායම් බිනාරි අයිරෝනි පරීක්ෂණය තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය වැඩකට යතුරු වැඩක්. අපේ විධානය වෙනස් හැඟීම් තියෙන පුංචි කොටස් වලින් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. අපි ට්විට්ස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්න වාක්ෂාවක් භාවිත කරනවා. ඊට පස්සේ අපි ඒ වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් LSTM-අධාරිත න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය නිර්මාණයක් භාවිත කරනවා ඒක ට්විට්ට් වලට භාවිත අන්තිමේදි, අපි සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්බන්ධ ජාලයෙක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා විශේෂණයක් ලැබීමට', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ku qornaa nidaamka loo soo dhiibay SemEval 2018 shaqo 3 (baaritaanka Ironika ee Tweetka Ingiriis) Subtask A oo kooxda Binarizer ku qoray. Irony detection is a key task for many natural language processing works.  Shaqooyinkayada ayaa isticmaalaya tweetka ironicka ah si ay ugu jirto qeybo yar oo ka mid ah fikrada kala duduwan. Tweetkiiba waxaannu u burburinaynaa hadal gooni ah oo lagu isticmaalayo baaritaanka ku xiran. Markaas waxaan soo bandhignay hadalkaas oo lagu isticmaalay qaab shabakad neuro ah oo ku saleysan LSTM, kaas oo horay loo tababariyey si uu u sii sheego fikrada Tweetka. Ugu dambeyso waxaynu tababarinnaa shabakad aad u xidhiidhayso si aan u gaadhno fasalka.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi det system som lämnats in för SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) Subtask A av teamet Binarizer. Ironi detektering är en viktig uppgift för många naturliga språkbearbetningsarbeten. Vår metod behandlar ironiska tweets till att bestå av mindre delar som innehåller olika känslor. Vi bryter ner tweets i separata fraser med hjälp av en beroendetolkare. Vi bäddar sedan in dessa fraser med hjälp av en LSTM-baserad neuralt nätverksmodell som är förberedd för att förutsäga uttryckssymboler för tweets. Slutligen utbildar vi ett fullt uppkopplat nätverk för att uppnå klassificering.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem podignut za zadatak 3. iz polovice 2018. godine (detekcija Ironija na engleskim tweets) podzadatak A tim Binarizer. Otkrivanje željeza je ključni zadatak za mnoge prirodne obrade jezika. Naš metod tretira ironične tweets da se sastoji od manjih dijelova koje sadrže različite emocije. Razdvojimo tweets u odvojene rečenice koristeći analizu zavisnosti. Onda uključimo te rečenice koristeći LSTM-based neuralnu mrežu model koji je pre-obučen da predvidimo emotike za tweet. Konačno treniramo potpuno povezanu mrežu da bi postigli klasifikaciju.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் செம்வால் 2018 பணி 3 (ஆங்கிலத்தில் ஐரோனி கண்டுபிடிப்பு) குழு பினாரிஸர் ஆல் துணை செய்தி இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலுக்கு ஒரு முக்கிய செயல். எங்கள் முறையில் வித்தியாசமான உணர்வுகளைக் கொண்ட சிறிய பகுதிகளை சேர்க்கிறது. சார்பு சார்பு விளக்கம் பயன்படுத்தி தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளை வேறு வாக்கியங்களாக ந பின்னர் நாம் அந்த சொற்றொடர்களை LSTM-அடிப்படையில் உள்ள புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தினோம். இது முன்னால் பயிற்சி செய இறுதியாக, நாம் வகுப்பை பெற ஒரு முழு இணைக்கப்பட்ட வலைப்பின்னலை பயிற்சி செய்கிறோம்.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم نے سیسٹم کی توضیح دیتی ہے جو ٹیم بیناریزر کے ذریعہ سیم Eval 2018 ٹاکس 3 کے لئے پیش کیا گیا ہے۔ آئرونی شناسایی بہت سی طبیعی زبان پردازی کے لئے ایک کلی کام ہے. ہمارا طریقہ مختلف احساسات کے ساتھ مختلف چھوٹے ٹیوٹوں میں شامل ہوتا ہے۔ ہم ٹویٹوں کو ایک ڈیروپانسیٹ پارٹر کے مطابق مختلف فریزوں میں تقسیم کرتے ہیں۔ اس کے بعد ہم ان فریزوں کو LSTM بنیاد نیورال نیٹ ورک موڈل کے مطابق پیدا کرتے ہیں جو ٹویٹ کے لئے ایموٹیکونوں کی پیش آموزش کی جاتی ہے۔ بالآخر، ہم ایک کامل متصل نیٹ ورک کی تطارین کرتے ہیں کہ کلاسپیٹ پہنچ سکیں۔', 'uz': "Bu takarda biz SemEval 2018 Vazifa 3 (Ingliz Twitterda Iron qidirish) tashkilotni Binarizer guruhi bilan ajratilgan tizimni anglatamiz. Name Bizning usuli har hil hissiyotlarning kichkina bir qismlardan foydalanishimizni o'rganadi. Biz Twittlarni tasdiqlash imkoniyatini alohida bir so'zlar bilan birlashtiramiz. Keyin biz bu so'zlarni Twitter uchun foydalanishdan oldin foydalanish uchun LSTM asosida neyrol tarmoq modeli bilan ishga tushirib bordik. Biz sinfni olish uchun butun bog'liq tarmoqni o'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ báo này, chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống được gửi cho nhiệm vụ SemEvl 2008 3 (phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter tiếng Anh) Subask A của đội Binarizer. Phát hiện mỉa mai là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng cho nhiều công trình xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Cách của chúng tôi điều khiển những tweet trớ trêu thành từng phần nhỏ có cảm xúc khác nhau. Chúng tôi chia nhỏ Twitter thành những cụm từ khác nhau dùng một phân tích phụ thuộc. Chúng tôi thêm những cụm từ đó vào một mô hình mạng thần kinh dựa trên LSTM, được chuẩn bị để dự đoán biểu tượng cho Twitter. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi đào tạo một mạng lưới kết nối hoàn to àn để phân loại.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem podignut za zadatak 3. iz polovice 2018. godine (detekcija Ironija na engleskim tweets) podzadatak A tim Binarizer. Otkrivanje željeza je ključni zadatak za mnoge prirodne obrade jezika. Naš metod tretira ironične tweets da se sastoji od manjih dijelova koje sadrže različite emocije. Razdvojimo tweets u odvojene rečenice koristeći analizu ovisnosti. Onda uključimo te fraze koristeći LSTM-based neuralnu mrežu model koji je predobučen predvidjeti emotike za tweets. Konačno, treniramo potpuno povezanu mrežu kako bi postigli klasifikaciju.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we het systeem dat is ingediend voor de SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Ironie detection in English tweets) Subtaak A door het team Binarizer. Ironie detectie is een belangrijke taak voor veel natuurlijke taalverwerkingswerken. Onze methode behandelt ironische tweets als kleine delen met verschillende emoties. We splitsen tweets op in afzonderlijke zinnen met behulp van een afhankelijkheidsparser. We integreren die zinnen vervolgens met behulp van een LSTM-gebaseerd neuraal netwerkmodel dat vooraf is getraind om emoticons voor tweets te voorspellen. Tot slot trainen we een volledig verbonden netwerk om classificatie te bereiken.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме системата, представена за задача 3 (откриване на ирония в английски туитове) от екипа на Бинаризер. Откриването на ирония е ключова задача за много обработки на естествени езици. Нашият метод третира ироничните туитове като съставени от по-малки части, съдържащи различни емоции. Разбиваме туитовете на отделни фрази с помощта на анализатор на зависимости. След това вграждаме тези фрази с помощта на базиран модел на невронна мрежа, който е предварително обучен да предвижда емотикони за туитове. И накрая, обучаваме напълно свързана мрежа за постигане на класификация.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi det system, der blev indsendt til SemEval 2018 Opgave 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) Underopgave A af teamet Binarizer. Ironi detektion er en vigtig opgave for mange arbejder med naturlig sprogbehandling. Vores metode behandler ironiske tweets til at bestå af mindre dele, der indeholder forskellige følelser. Vi opdeler tweets i separate sætninger ved hjælp af en afhængighedsfortolker. Vi integrerer derefter disse sætninger ved hjælp af en LSTM-baseret neural netværksmodel, som er præ-trænet til at forudsige humørikoner for tweets. Endelig træner vi et fuldt forbundet netværk for at opnå klassificering.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir das System, das vom Team Binarizer für die SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) Subtask A eingereicht wurde. Ironie-Erkennung ist eine Schlüsselaufgabe für viele natürliche Sprachverarbeitungsarbeiten. Unsere Methode behandelt ironische Tweets so, dass sie aus kleineren Teilen bestehen, die unterschiedliche Emotionen enthalten. Wir zerlegen Tweets in separate Phrasen mithilfe eines Abhängigkeitsparsers. Wir betten diese Phrasen dann mithilfe eines LSTM-basierten neuronalen Netzwerkmodells ein, das vortrainiert ist, Emoticons für Tweets vorherzusagen. Schließlich trainieren wir ein vollständig vernetztes Netzwerk, um Klassifizierung zu erreichen.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar untuk SemEval 2018 Task 3 (deteksi ironi dalam tweet Inggris) Subtask A oleh tim Binarizer. Deteksi ironi adalah tugas kunci untuk banyak proses bahasa alam. Metode kami memperlakukan tweet ironis untuk terdiri dari bagian kecil yang mengandung emosi yang berbeda. We break down tweets into separate phrases using a dependency parser.  Kemudian kami memasang frasa-frasa itu menggunakan model jaringan saraf berdasarkan LSTM yang dilatih-dilatih untuk memprediksi emotikon untuk tweet. Akhirnya, kita melatih jaringan yang terhubung sepenuhnya untuk mencapai klasifikasi.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، سیستم را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که برای تابع ۱۹۸۸ (کشف آیرونی در tweets انگلیسی) زیر تابع A توسط تیم بیناریزر فرستاده شده است. شناسایی آیرونی یک کار کلید برای بسیاری از کارهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. روش ما تويت هاي مسخره اي رو درمان ميکنه که از بخش هاي کوچکتري که دارن احساسات مختلف ما تویتها را به جمله\u200cهای جدا جدا می\u200cکنیم با استفاده از یک بازیگر بستگی. سپس این جمله\u200cها را با استفاده از یک مدل شبکه عصبی بر اساس LSTM، وارد می\u200cکنیم که برای پیش آموزش احساسات برای توئیت پیش\u200cبینی شده است. بالاخره، ما یک شبکه کاملاً متصل شده را آموزش می دهیم تا به راهنمایی رسید.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 팀 바이너리 프로그램이SemEval 2018 퀘스트 3(영어 트윗의 반풍 검측) 하위 퀘스트 A로 제출된 시스템을 묘사했다.반어 검측은 많은 자연 언어 처리 업무의 관건적인 임무이다.우리의 방법은 풍자 추문을 서로 다른 정서를 포함하는 작은 부분으로 간주한다.우리는 의존항 해석기를 사용하여 추문을 단독 단어로 분해합니다.그리고 우리는 LSTM 기반의 신경 네트워크 모델을 사용하여 이 단어들을 삽입했다. 이 모델은 사전 훈련을 통해 추문의 표정을 예측할 수 있다.마지막으로 우리는 분류를 실현하기 위해 완전히 연결된 네트워크를 훈련했다.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë sistemin e paraqitur për SemEval 2018 Task 3 (zbulim ironi në tweet anglez) Subtask A nga ekipi Binarizer. Zbulimi i ironisë është një detyrë kyçe për shumë punë natyrore të procesimit të gjuhës. Metoda jonë trajton tweetet ironike që përbëhen nga pjesë më të vogla që përmbajnë emocione të ndryshme. We break down tweets into separate phrases using a dependency parser.  Pastaj i përfshijmë këto fraza duke përdorur një model rrjeti nervor bazuar në LSTM që është i stërvitur për të parashikuar emocionet për tweetet. Më në fund, ne trajnojmë një rrjet plotësisht të lidhur për të arritur klasifikimin.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, 2018-nji Görev 3 üçin bellenilip sistemini tashylaýarys Taýry diller işleýän işleri üçin a çyk täblisidir. Biziň yöntemimiz ironiki tweets edip, farklı duýgular içinde kiçi böleklerden meňzeýär. Biz tweets'i bağlılık täzeliklerini ulanarak ayrı sözlere bölýäris. Sonra bu frazleri LSTM tabanly näral şebeke modelini ullanýarys. Bu duýuklary tweets üçin öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden geçirilýär. Soňunda, klasifikasiýa ýetmek üçin doly bir syýal bilen baglanyp taýýarlapdyk.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea mfumo uliotolewa kwa ajili ya kazi 3 ya SemEval 2018 (Ugunduzi wa Ujerumani kwa twiti za Kiingereza) Ujumbe wa A na timu Binarizer. Ugunduzi wa ujinga ni kazi muhimu kwa ajili ya utaratibu wa lugha nyingi za asili. Utawala wetu unatumia twiti za kejeli ili kuweza kuwa na sehemu ndogo yenye hisia tofauti. Tunapata twiti katika maneno tofauti kwa kutumia mchambuzi wa kutegemea. Kisha tukaweka misemo hizo kwa kutumia muundo wa mtandao wa neura wa LSTM ambao umefundishwa kabla ya kutabiri hisia kwa twiti. Mwisho, tunafundisha mtandao unaohusishwa kabisa ili kupata ufafanuzi.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ ለSemEval 2018 ስራ 3 (በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች የኢዮኒ ግለጽ) የቡድን ቢናሪzer አዳራጅ የተዘጋጀውን ስርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የኢዮኒ ግለጫ ለብዙ ፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ ሥራ ነው፡፡ የኢትዮጵያ ትዊተሮችን ልዩ ልዩ አሳብ የሚኖሩትን ትንሽ ክፍሎች ለመቆጣጠር ነው፡፡ ትዊተሮችን በተለየ ቃላት እናስወግዳለን፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ እነዚህን ቃላት የLSTM አካባቢ የኔural network model በመጠቀም ለTweets የተማረከውን የኢትዮጵያውያንን ለማስታወቂያ ለመጠየቅ አቀረብን፡፡ በመጨረሻም ግንኙነት ለማግኘት የተጠቃሚ መረብ እናስተምራለን፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons die stelsel voorgestuur vir die SemEval 2018 taak 3 (Irony beskrywing in Engels tweets) Subtask A deur die team Binarizer. Name Ons metode behandel ironiese tweets om te bestaan van kleinere dele wat verskillende emosies bevat. Ons breek tweets af in aparte frase met 'n afhanklikheidspanser. Ons inbêer dan dié frase met gebruik van 'n LSTM-gebaseerde neuralnetwerk model wat voor-opgelei is om emotikies vir tweets te voorskou. Eindelik, ons tref 'n volledige verbind netwerk om klasifikasie te bereik.", 'hy': 'In this paper, we describe the system submitted for the SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) Subtask A by the team Binarizer.  Իրոնիայի հայտնաբերումը շատ բնական լեզվի վերամշակման գործերի հիմնական խնդիր է: Մեր մեթոդը վերաբերում է հեգնական թվիթերին, որը կազմված է փոքր մասերից, որոնք պարունակում են տարբեր զգացմունքներ: Մենք բաժանում ենք թվիթերը առանձին արտահայտություններով՝ օգտագործելով կախվածության վերլուծում: Այնուհետև մենք ներառում ենք այդ արտահայտությունները օգտագործելով LSMT-ով հիմնված նյարդային ցանցի մոդել, որը նախապատրաստված է թվիթերի էմոտիկոնների կանխատեսելու համար: Վերջապես, մենք վարժեցնում ենք ամբողջովին կապված ցանց դասակարգման հասնելու համար:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সেমইভাল ২০১৮ টাস্ক ৩ (ইংরেজি টুইটে আইরোনি আবিষ্কার) বিনারিজারের দলের সাবকাজ এ-এর ব্যাখ্যা করেছি। বেশিরভাগ প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য আইরোনি আবিষ্কার একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিদ্রোহীত টুইটের ব্যবস্থা করে বিভিন্ন অনুভূতির মধ্যে ছোট অংশ রয়েছে। আমরা টুইট বিভিন্ন বাক্যে ভেঙ্গে ফেলি একটি নির্ভরিত ব্যাখ্যা ব্যবহার করে। তারপর আমরা এলএসএমভিত্তিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল ব্যবহার করে এই বাক্ষরগুলোকে টুইটের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করেছিলাম। Finally, we train a fully-connected network to achieve classification.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem podignut za zadatak 3. iz polovice 2018. Otkrivanje željeza je ključni zadatak za mnoge prirodne obrade jezika. Naš metod tretira ironične tweets da se sastoji od manjih dijelova koje sadrže različite emocije. Razdvojimo tweete u odvojene rečenice koristeći analizu ovisnosti. Onda uključimo te rečenice koristeći LSTM-based neuralnu mrežu model koji je predobučen predvidjeti emotike za tweet. Konačno treniramo potpuno povezanu mrežu da bi postigli klasifikaciju.', 'az': 'Bu kağıtda, 2018-ci SemEval Task 3 (İngilizə tweets içində Irony Detection) A-si Binarizer tərəfindən göndərilmiş sistemi təsdiqləyirik. İroni tanıdırması təbiətli dil işləməsi üçün bir çox anahtar işidir. Bizim yolumuz fərqli duyguları içərisində olan kiçik parçalardan olub ironik tweets təhsil edir. Tövratları bağlılıq ayırıcısı ilə ayrı sözlərə bölükləyirik. Sonra bu sözləri LSTM tabanlı nöral ağ modeli ilə birlikdə yerləşdiririk ki, twet üçün emotikləri tədbir etmək üçün əvvəl təhsil edilmişdir. Sonunda, sırlaşdırmaq üçün tamamlanmış şəbəkə təhsil edirik.', 'ca': "En aquest article, descrivim el sistema presentat per la tasca 3 SemEval 2018 (detecció d'ironia en tweets anglès) Subtasca A per l'equip Binarizer. La detecció d'ironia és una tasca clau per a moltes obres naturals de processament de llenguatges. El nostre mètode tracta els tweets irònics com a parts més petites que contenen emocions diferents. Dividim els tweets en frases separades fent servir un analitzador de dependencies. Després incorporarem aquestes frases utilitzant un model de xarxa neural basat en LSTM que està pré-entrenat per predir emocions per tweets. Finalment, entrenem una xarxa totalment connectada per aconseguir classificació.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme systém předložený pro SemEval 2018 Task 3 (detekce ironie v anglických tweetech) Subúkol A týmem Binarizer. Detekce ironie je klíčovým úkolem pro mnoho prací přirozeného jazyka. Naše metoda zachází s ironickými tweety tak, aby se skládaly z menších částí obsahujících různé emoce. Rozdělíme tweety do samostatných frází pomocí parseru závislostí. Tyto fráze pak vložíme pomocí modelu neuronové sítě založeného na LSTM, který je předem trénovaný pro předpovídání emotikonů pro tweety. Nakonec trénujeme plně propojenou síť, abychom dosáhli klasifikace.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme Binarizer-tiimin SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) -alitehtävään A lähettämää järjestelmää. Ironian havaitseminen on monien luonnollisten kielten käsittelytöiden keskeinen tehtävä. Menetelmämme käsittelee ironisia twiittejä pienempiin osiin, jotka sisältävät erilaisia tunteita. Jaamme tweetit erillisiksi lauseiksi riippuvuuden jäsentäjän avulla. Tämän jälkeen upotamme nämä lauseet käyttäen LSTM-pohjaista neuroverkkomallia, joka on ennalta koulutettu ennustamaan hymiöitä tweeteille. Lopuksi koulutamme täysin kytketyn verkon luokituksen saavuttamiseksi.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame Binarizeri meeskonna poolt SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in English tweets) alaülesande A jaoks esitatud süsteemi. Ironia tuvastamine on paljude looduskeele töötlemise tööde võtmetähtsus. Meie meetod käsitleb iroonilisi säutseid nii, et need koosnevad väiksematest osadest, mis sisaldavad erinevaid emotsioone. Jagame säutsud eraldi fraasideks, kasutades sõltuvuspartserit. Seejärel lisame need fraasid LSTM-il põhineva närvivõrgu mudeli abil, mis on eelõpetatud ennustama emotikone säutsude jaoks. Lõpuks koolitame täielikult ühendatud võrku, et saavutada klassifikatsioon.', 'jv': 'Nan pepulan iki, kita rambaran sistem sing nyebatuhi nggawe semebal 2008 task 3 AllProgressBar Rasané awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk gak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan. Tulung Amarok tambah punika dipunanggo oleh kapan Lha wih-wih, awak dhéwé luwih sedhaya kabèh dumateng nêmên kanggo ngerasakno.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana shi na'urar da aka saka wa aikin na SemEl 2018 Tafiyar 3 (mai gano Iron cikin Ingiriya). Subjob A na rubutun Team Binarizar. Zani'anin Iron na zama wani aikin maɓalli wa masu aikin aiki masu yawa na fassarar harshe. Kayan hanyoyinmu na yi amfani da Twitter na yin izgili, ta kasance daga rabo ƙarami wanda ke ƙunsa da hisãbi dabam-dabam. We break down tweets into separate phrases using a dependency parser.  Sa'an nan kuma Muka buɗe wannan magana da Muka yi amfani da wani misali na jerin neura a kan LSSM wanda aka yi wa zaman wa'adi ga ya yi bayani ga aikin ayoyoyi wa Twitter. Ya ƙarshe, muna tafiyar da wani shirin da aka samu'a zuwa wani fassara.", 'sk': 'V tem prispevku opisujemo sistem, ki ga je ekipa Binarizer predložila za podnalogo A SemEval 2018 Task 3 (Irony detection in angleški tweets). Odkrivanje ironije je ključna naloga za številna dela obdelave naravnega jezika. Naša metoda obravnava ironične tweete kot sestavljene iz manjših delov, ki vsebujejo različna čustva. Tweete razdelimo v ločene fraze z uporabo računalnika odvisnosti. Te fraze nato vgradimo z uporabo modela nevronskega omrežja, ki temelji na LSTM, ki je vnaprej usposobljen za napovedovanje čustvenih ikon za tweete. Nazadnje usposabljamo popolnoma povezano omrežje za dosego klasifikacije.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים את המערכת שנשלחה למשימה 3 של SemEval 2018. זיהוי אירוניה הוא משימה מפתחת עבודות מעבדת שפות טבעיות רבות. השיטה שלנו מתייחסת לטוויטים אירוניים שיכולים לחלקים קטנים שמכילים רגשות שונים. אנחנו פורקים טוויטים לתוך ביטויים נפרדים באמצעות מעבד תלויות. ואז נכניס את המשפטים האלה באמצעות מודל רשת עצבית מבוסס על LSTM אשר מאומן מראש כדי לחזות רגשיות לטוויטים. סוף סוף, אנחנו מאמן רשת מחוברת לחלוטין כדי להשיג מסווג.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མ་ལག་པོ་SemEval 2018 ལས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་གཙོ་ཆེ་བ་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཨི་རན་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ལས་སེམས་ཚོར་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཀུ་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་བརྟེན་འབྲེལ་རྩིས་པ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྐང་དབྱེ་བ་བཏོན་བྱེད། དེ་ནས་འུ་ཚིག མཐའ་མར་དེ་ལ། ང་ཚོས་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'ValenTO at SemEval-2018 Task 3 : Exploring the Role of Affective Content for Detecting Irony in English Tweets', 'ar': 'ValenTO في SemEval-2018 المهمة 3: استكشاف دور المحتوى العاطفي للكشف عن السخرية في التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية', 'fr': "ValEnto au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 3\xa0: Explorer le rôle du contenu affectif dans la détection de l'ironie dans les tweets en anglais", 'pt': 'ValenTO no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 3: Explorando o papel do conteúdo afetivo para detectar ironia em tweets em inglês', 'es': 'Valento en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2018: Explorando el papel del contenido afectivo para detectar la ironía en los tuits en inglés', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のValenTOタスク3 ：英語のツイートにおけるアイロニーを検出するための感情的コンテンツの役割を探る', 'zh': 'ValenTO在SemEval-2018务3:原情在检英语推文讽刺性用', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 3 पर ValenTO: अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाने के लिए भावात्मक सामग्री की भूमिका की खोज', 'ru': 'ValenTO на SemEval-2018 Задача 3: Изучение роли аффективного контента для обнаружения иронии в английских твитах', 'ga': 'ValenTO ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 3: Iniúchadh ar Ról Ábhar Tionchar chun íoróin a Bhrath i dTvuíteanna Béarla', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Εξερεύνηση του ρόλου του προσβλητικού περιεχομένου για την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα Αγγλικά', 'kk': 'Валентонто 3. тапсырмасы: Ағылшын tweets тізімдерінде иронияны анықтау үшін эффективті мазмұның рөлін зерттеу', 'it': "ValenTO al SemEval-2018 Task 3: Esplorare il ruolo dei contenuti affettivi per rilevare l'ironia nei tweet inglesi", 'mk': 'ValenTO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Affective Content for Detecting Irony in English Tweets', 'ka': 'გალენტო სამუშაო-2018 დავალება სამუშაო სამუშაო: აფექტიური შემდგომარების პროლის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'ValenTO a SemEval-2018 3. feladaton: Az érintett tartalom szerepének feltárása az irónia felismerésében angol tweetekben', 'ms': 'ValenTO di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Menjelaskan Rol Kandungan Affectif untuk Mengesan Ironi dalam Tweets Inggeris', 'lt': 'ValenTO „SemEval-2018“ 3 užduotis: paveikimo turinio vaidmens nustatymo anglų dvietais tyrimas', 'mt': 'ValenTO f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 3: L-esplorazzjoni tar-Rwol tal-Kontenut Affettiv għad-Detezzjoni tal-Ironja fit-Tweets Ingliżi', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 3: ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d ഐറോണിനെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അഫാക്റ്റീവ് ഉള്ളടക്കം', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 3: Англи Tweets-д Төмөр нээж буй газрын хөрөнгө оруулах нөлөөг судлах', 'ro': 'ValenTO la SemEval-2018 Task 3: Explorarea rolului conținutului afectiv pentru detectarea ironiei în tweeturile engleze', 'no': 'ValenTO på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 3: Utforskar rollen av effektivt innhald for oppdaging av Irony i engelsk tweet', 'sr': 'ValenTO na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: istraživanje uloge efektivnog sadržaja za otkrivanje Ironije na engleskim tweetima', 'sv': 'ValenTO på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 3: Att undersöka betydelsen av affektivt innehåll för att upptäcka ironi i engelska tweets', 'pl': 'ValenTO na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 3: Badanie roli treści afektywnych w wykrywaniu ironii w angielskich tweetach', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் வாலென்டோ', 'si': 'වැලෙන්ටනෝ සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 3: ඉංග්\u200dරීස් ට්විට්ස් වල අයිරෝනි හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා', 'so': 'ValenTO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Affective Content for Detecting Ironin in English Tweets', 'ur': 'ویلنٹو ٹاکس 3 میں سمیوئل-2018 ٹاکس: انگلیسی ٹویٹ میں آئرونی پتچانے کے لئے اثرات منصوبات کا رول تحقیق کرنا', 'uz': '3 Vazifani SemEval- 2018 bilan ValenTO: Inglizcha Twitterlar bilan aniqlash uchun Effective Content Role', 'vi': 'ValenTO ở SemEvl-208 Task 3: Khám phá vai trò của điều kiện quyết định để phát hiện mỉa mai bằng tiếng Anh Tweet', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Изследване на ролята на афективното съдържание за откриване на ирония в английски туитове', 'da': 'ValenTO på SemEval-2018 Opgave 3: Udforsk rollen af påvirket indhold til detektering af ironi i engelske tweets', 'nl': 'ValenTO op SemEval-2018 Taak 3: Onderzoek naar de rol van affectieve content voor het opsporen van ironie in Engelse Tweets', 'hr': 'ValenTO na zadatku 3. poluvremeno-2018: istraživanje uloge efektivnog sadržaja za otkrivanje Ironije na engleskim tweetima', 'id': 'ValenTO di SemEval-2018 Tugas 3: Menjelaskan Role of Affective Content for Detecting Irony in English Tweets', 'de': 'ValenTO bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 3: Untersuchung der Rolle affektiver Inhalte bei der Erkennung von Ironie in englischen Tweets', 'ko': 'ValenTO가SemEval-18 임무3: 감정 내용을 탐색하는 것이 영어 트윗에서 역설적인 작용을 측정한다', 'fa': 'ولنتونو در تابع سوم Eval-2018 تابع ۳: تحقیق روش محتوای تاثیر برای شناسایی آهنی در Tweets انگلیسی', 'tr': 'ValenTO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Effective Content for Detecting Irony in English Tweets', 'sw': 'ValenTO kwenye SemEval-2018 Task 3: Kuelezea Role ya Content Affective kwa Kuchunguza Uholanzi kwa Twita za Kiingereza', 'af': 'Valento by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 3: Ondersoek die rol van effektiewe inhoud vir beskrywing van Ironie in Engels Tweets', 'sq': 'ValenTO në SemEval-2018 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Affective Content for Detecting Irony in English Tweets', 'am': 'ValenTO at SemEval-2018 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Affective Content for Detecting Irony in English Tweets', 'hy': 'Վալենտո, 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ-2018"-ի 3. խնդիր. Անֆեկտիվ պարունակության դերի ուսումնասիրելը անգլերեն թվիթերում', 'az': "ValenTO'da SemEval-2018 Görevi 3: İroni İngilizci Tövetlərdə keşfetmək üçün Etkili Məzmun Roli Exploring the Role of Effective Content", 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৩-এ ভ্যালেন্টো: ইংরেজী টুইটারে আইরোনিকে সনাক্ত করার জন্য আফেক্টিভ বিষয়বস্তুর ভূমিকা বিশ্লেষণ করছে', 'cs': 'ValenTO na SemEval-2018 Úkol 3: Zkoumání role affektivního obsahu pro detekci ironie v anglických tweetech', 'bs': 'ValenTO na semiEval-2018 zadatku 3: istraživanje uloge efektivnog sadržaja za otkrivanje željeza na engleskim tweetima', 'et': 'ValenTO SemEval-2018 ülesanne 3: mõjutava sisu rolli uurimine iroonia tuvastamisel inglise keeles Tweets', 'ca': 'ValenTO a SemEval-2018 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Affective Content for Detecting Irony in English Tweets', 'fi': 'ValenTO SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 3: Affektiivisen sisällön roolin tutkiminen ironian havaitsemisessa englanninkielisissä twieteissä', 'jv': 'Janet Smith (2013)', 'he': 'ValenTO ב SemEval-2018 משימה 3: לחקור את תפקיד התוכן השפעיל לגלות אירוניה בטוויטים אנגליים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'ValenTO na SemEval-2018 naloga 3: Raziskovanje vloge afektivnih vsebin za odkrivanje ironije v angleških tweetih', 'bo': 'ValenTO ལུ་ SemEval-2018 དྲ་ཐོག་གི་ལས་ཀ་གསུམ།: ཨིན་ཡིག་གི་ཟིན་བྲིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་ཡུལ་སྟོན་ཚོགས་ལས་་་'}
{'en': 'In this paper we describe the system used by the ValenTO team in the shared task on Irony Detection in English Tweets at SemEval 2018. The system takes as starting point emotIDM, an irony detection model that explores the use of affective features based on a wide range of lexical resources available for English, reflecting different facets of affect. We experimented with different settings, by exploiting different classifiers and features, and participated both to the binary irony detection task and to the task devoted to distinguish among different types of irony. We report on the results obtained by our system both in a constrained setting and unconstrained setting, where we explored the impact of using additional data in the training phase, such as corpora annotated for the presence of irony or sarcasm from the state of the art. Overall, the performance of our system seems to validate the important role that affective information has for identifying ironic content in Twitter.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف النظام الذي يستخدمه فريق ValenTO في المهمة المشتركة حول اكتشاف السخرية في التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية في SemEval 2018. يأخذ النظام كنقطة انطلاق emotIDM ، وهو نموذج للكشف عن المفارقة يستكشف استخدام الميزات العاطفية بناءً على نطاق واسع من الموارد المعجمية المتاحة للغة الإنجليزية ، والتي تعكس جوانب مختلفة من التأثير. لقد جربنا إعدادات مختلفة ، من خلال استغلال المصنفات والميزات المختلفة ، وشاركنا في مهمة اكتشاف المفارقة الثنائية والمهمة المخصصة للتمييز بين أنواع مختلفة من المفارقة. نقوم بالإبلاغ عن النتائج التي حصل عليها نظامنا في كل من وضع مقيد وإعداد غير مقيد ، حيث استكشفنا تأثير استخدام بيانات إضافية في مرحلة التدريب ، مثل مجموعة مشروحة لوجود السخرية أو السخرية من أحدث ما توصلت إليه التقنية. بشكل عام ، يبدو أن أداء نظامنا يثبت صحة الدور المهم الذي تلعبه المعلومات المؤثرة في تحديد المحتوى المثير للسخرية في تويتر.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo descrevemos o sistema utilizado pela equipe ValenTO na tarefa compartilhada de Irony Detection in English Tweets no SemEval 2018. O sistema toma como ponto de partida o emotIDM, um modelo de detecção de ironia que explora o uso de recursos afetivos baseados em uma ampla gama de de recursos lexicais disponíveis para o inglês, refletindo diferentes facetas do afeto. Experimentamos diferentes configurações, explorando diferentes classificadores e recursos, e participamos tanto da tarefa de detecção de ironia binária quanto da tarefa dedicada à distinção entre diferentes tipos de ironia. Relatamos os resultados obtidos pelo nosso sistema tanto em um cenário restrito quanto em um cenário irrestrito, onde exploramos o impacto do uso de dados adicionais na fase de treinamento, como corpora anotados para a presença de ironia ou sarcasmo do estado da arte. No geral, o desempenho do nosso sistema parece validar o importante papel que a informação afetiva tem para a identificação de conteúdo irônico no Twitter.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons le système utilisé par l'équipe ValEnto dans la tâche partagée sur la détection de l'ironie dans les tweets anglais au SemEval 2018. Le système prend comme point de départ EmotiDM, un modèle de détection de l'ironie qui explore l'utilisation de caractéristiques affectives basées sur un large éventail de ressources lexicales disponibles pour l'anglais, reflétant différentes facettes de l'affect. Nous avons expérimenté différents paramètres, en exploitant différents classificateurs et fonctionnalités, et nous avons participé à la fois à la tâche de détection de l'ironie binaire et à la tâche consacrée à la distinction entre les différents types d'ironie. Nous présentons les résultats obtenus par notre système à la fois dans un environnement contraint et un environnement sans contrainte, où nous avons exploré l'impact de l'utilisation de données supplémentaires dans la phase de formation, telles que des corpus annotés pour la présence d'ironie ou de sarcasme issus de l'état de l'art. Dans l'ensemble, les performances de notre système semblent valider le rôle important que jouent les informations affectives dans l'identification des contenus ironiques sur Twitter.", 'es': 'En este artículo describimos el sistema utilizado por el equipo de Valento en la tarea compartida sobre Detección de ironía en los tuits en inglés en SemEval 2018. El sistema toma como punto de partida EmotiDM, un modelo de detección de ironía que explora el uso de las características afectivas a partir de una amplia gama de recursos léxicos disponibles para el inglés, que reflejan las diferentes facetas del afecto. Experimentamos con diferentes escenarios, explotando diferentes clasificadores y características, y participamos tanto en la tarea de detección de ironía binaria como en la tarea dedicada a distinguir entre diferentes tipos de ironía. Informamos sobre los resultados obtenidos por nuestro sistema tanto en un entorno restringido como en un entorno sin restricciones, donde exploramos el impacto del uso de datos adicionales en la fase de entrenamiento, como cuerpos anotados por la presencia de ironía o sarcasmo del estado del arte. En general, el rendimiento de nuestro sistema parece validar el importante papel que desempeña la información afectiva para identificar el contenido irónico en Twitter.', 'zh': '本文ValenTO团队述SemEval 2018英语推刺共事之统。 统以emotIDM为始,刺意之检也,盖博英语词汇探情之用,见情之异也。 因器而试之,参二进制刺而专刺。 臣等言系统于受限设、无约束之中,其间讨论训练用他数事,如注为先进刺刺之语料库。 总体而言,吾性似验情Twitter刺之要也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम SemEval 2018 में अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में विडंबना का पता लगाने पर साझा कार्य में ValenTO टीम द्वारा उपयोग की जाने वाली प्रणाली का वर्णन करते हैं। सिस्टम प्रारंभिक बिंदु emotIDM के रूप में लेता है, एक विडंबना का पता लगाने वाला मॉडल जो अंग्रेजी के लिए उपलब्ध लेक्सिकल संसाधनों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला के आधार पर भावात्मक सुविधाओं के उपयोग की पड़ताल करता है, जो प्रभाव के विभिन्न पहलुओं को दर्शाता है। हमने विभिन्न क्लासिफायरों और विशेषताओं का शोषण करके, विभिन्न सेटिंग्स के साथ प्रयोग किया, और बाइनरी विडंबना का पता लगाने के कार्य और विभिन्न प्रकार की विडंबनाओं के बीच अंतर करने के लिए समर्पित कार्य दोनों में भाग लिया। हम एक विवश सेटिंग और अप्रतिबंधित सेटिंग दोनों में हमारे सिस्टम द्वारा प्राप्त परिणामों पर रिपोर्ट करते हैं, जहां हमने प्रशिक्षण चरण में अतिरिक्त डेटा का उपयोग करने के प्रभाव का पता लगाया, जैसे कि कला की स्थिति से विडंबना या व्यंग्य की उपस्थिति के लिए एनोटेट किए गए कॉर्पोरेट। कुल मिलाकर, हमारे सिस्टम का प्रदर्शन महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका को मान्य करने के लिए प्रतीत होता है जो ट्विटर में विडंबनापूर्ण सामग्री की पहचान करने के लिए भावनात्मक जानकारी है।', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2018での英語ツイートにおけるアイロニー検出の共有タスクでValenTOチームが使用しているシステムについて説明します。このシステムは、さまざまな影響の側面を反映して、英語で利用可能な幅広い語彙リソースに基づいて情動的特徴の使用を探求する皮肉検出モデルであるemotIDMを出発点としています。異なる分類子や特徴を活用して異なる設定を実験し、バイナリ皮肉検出タスクと異なるタイプの皮肉を区別するためのタスクの両方に参加しました。私たちは、制約された設定と制約されていない設定の両方でシステムによって得られた結果について報告し、ここで私たちは、トレーニングフェーズで追加のデータを使用することの影響を探求しました。例えば、当時の技術から皮肉や皮肉の存在について注釈が付けられたコーラなどです。全体として、当社のシステムのパフォーマンスは、感情的な情報がTwitterの皮肉なコンテンツを特定するための重要な役割を検証しているように思われます。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем систему, используемую командой ValenTO в совместной задаче по обнаружению иронии в английских твитах на SemEval 2018. Система берет за отправную точку emotIDM, модель обнаружения иронии, которая исследует использование аффективных признаков на основе широкого спектра лексических ресурсов, доступных для английского языка, отражая различные грани аффекта. Мы экспериментировали с разными настройками, используя разные классификаторы и признаки, и участвовали как в задаче обнаружения бинарной иронии, так и в задаче, посвященной различению различных типов иронии. Мы сообщаем о результатах, полученных нашей системой как в ограниченной, так и в неограниченной среде, где мы исследовали влияние использования дополнительных данных на этапе обучения, таких как тела, аннотированные для наличия иронии или сарказма от современного уровня техники. В целом, производительность нашей системы, по-видимому, подтверждает ту важную роль, которую аффективная информация играет в выявлении ироничного контента в Twitter.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid cur síos ar an gcóras a úsáideann foireann ValenTO sa tasc roinnte ar Irony Detection in English Tweets ag SemEval 2018. Glacann an córas mar phointe tosaigh emotIDM, samhail braite íoróin a fhiosraíonn úsáid gnéithe affective bunaithe ar raon leathan. acmhainní foclóireachta atá ar fáil don Bhéarla, rud a léiríonn gnéithe éagsúla tionchair. Rinneamar turgnamh le suíomhanna éagsúla, trí leas a bhaint as aicmitheoirí agus gnéithe éagsúla, agus ghlacamar páirt sa tasc dénártha íoróin a bhrath agus sa tasc a bhí dírithe ar idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir cineálacha éagsúla íoróin. Tuairiscímid ar na torthaí a fhaigheann ár gcóras i suíomh srianta agus i suíomh neamhshrianta araon, áit a ndearnamar iniúchadh ar an tionchar a bheadh ag sonraí breise a úsáid sa chéim oiliúna, amhail corpora anótáilte maidir le láithreacht íoróin nó searbhas ón úrscothacht. Tríd is tríd, is cosúil go ndéanann feidhmíocht ár gcóras bailíochtú ar an ról tábhachtach atá ag faisnéis éifeachtúil maidir le hábhar íorónta a aithint ar Twitter.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία περιγράφουμε το σύστημα που χρησιμοποιείται από την ομάδα στην κοινή εργασία για την ανίχνευση ειρωνείας στα Αγγλικά Τουίτερ στο SemEval 2018. Το σύστημα παίρνει ως αφετηρία ένα μοντέλο ανίχνευσης ειρωνείας που διερευνά τη χρήση συναισθηματικών χαρακτηριστικών βασισμένων σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα λεξικών πόρων που είναι διαθέσιμοι για τα αγγλικά, αντικατοπτρίζοντας διαφορετικές πτυχές της επίδρασης. Πειραματιστήκαμε με διαφορετικές ρυθμίσεις, αξιοποιώντας διαφορετικούς ταξινομητές και χαρακτηριστικά, και συμμετείχαμε τόσο στην εργασία ανίχνευσης δυαδικής ειρωνείας όσο και στην εργασία που αφιερώθηκε στη διάκριση μεταξύ διαφορετικών τύπων ειρωνείας. Αναφέρουμε τα αποτελέσματα που αποκτήθηκαν από το σύστημά μας τόσο σε περιορισμένο όσο και σε απεριόριστο περιβάλλον, όπου διερευνήσαμε τον αντίκτυπο της χρήσης πρόσθετων δεδομένων στη φάση της εκπαίδευσης, όπως τα σώματα που σχολιάζονται για την παρουσία ειρωνείας ή σαρκασμού από την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Συνολικά, η απόδοση του συστήματός μας φαίνεται να επικυρώνει τον σημαντικό ρόλο που διαδραματίζει η συναισθηματική πληροφορία για τον εντοπισμό ειρωνικού περιεχομένου στο Twitter.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a ValenTO csapata által használt rendszert a SemEval 2018-as Irony Detection in English Tweets című közös feladatában. A rendszer kiindulópontként az emotIDM, egy irónia detektálási modell, amely az angol nyelven rendelkezésre álló lexikai források széles skáláján alapul az affektív jellemzők használatát vizsgálja, tükrözve a hatás különböző aspektusait. Különböző beállításokkal kísérleteztünk különböző osztályozók és funkciók kihasználásával, és részt vettünk mind a bináris irónia felismerésében, mind a különböző típusú irónia megkülönböztetésének feladatában. Rendszerünk által elért eredményekről beszámolunk mind korlátozott környezetben, mind korlátozott környezetben, mind korlátozott környezetben, ahol feltártuk a további adatok felhasználásának hatását az edzési fázisban, mint például az irónia vagy a szarkazmus jelenlétére jegyzetelt corpora. Összességében úgy tűnik, rendszerünk teljesítménye alátámasztja azt a fontos szerepet, amelyet az érzelmi információk betöltenek a Twitteren található ironikus tartalmak azonosításában.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ სისტემა, რომელიც გავალენტო ჯგუფის გამოიყენებული საერთო პარამეტრებში ინგლისური Tweets-ში SemEval 2018-ში. სისტემა იყენებს, როგორც წარმოდგენის emotIDM, იპონიის განახლების მოდელი, რომელიც გამოვიყენებს გამოყენებას გამოყენებას, რომელიც ინგლისურად ხელმისაწარმოდგენებული ლექსიკალური რეს ჩვენ განსხვავებული პარამეტრებით ექსპერიმენტირებდით, განსხვავებული კლასიფიკაციების და ფუნქციების გამოყენებით, და ორივე განსხვავებული თონიის განსხვავებაში დავწყენებდით. ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემის მიღებული წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომელსაც ჩვენ გავაკეთეთეთ დამატებული მონაცემების გამოყენება სტაზაციის ფაზაში, როგორც კოპორა, როგორც იპონია ან საპკასმის მოსახებისთვის. ჩვენი სისტემის შესაძლებლობა გავაკეთება გასაკეთებელი პროლის გასაკეთებელი ინფორმაციას, რომელიც გააკეთებელი ინფორმაციას Twitter-ში იდენტიფიკაციის ინფორმაციის შე', 'it': "In questo articolo descriviamo il sistema utilizzato dal team ValenTO nel compito condiviso su Irony Detection in English Tweets a SemEval 2018. Il sistema prende come punto di partenza emotIDM, un modello di rilevamento dell'ironia che esplora l'uso di caratteristiche affettive basato su una vasta gamma di risorse lessicali disponibili per l'inglese, riflettendo diverse sfaccettature dell'effetto. Abbiamo sperimentato diverse impostazioni, sfruttando diversi classificatori e caratteristiche, e partecipato sia al compito di rilevamento dell'ironia binaria che al compito dedicato a distinguere tra diversi tipi di ironia. Riportiamo sui risultati ottenuti dal nostro sistema sia in un ambiente limitato che in un ambiente privo di vincoli, dove abbiamo esplorato l'impatto dell'utilizzo di dati aggiuntivi nella fase di allenamento, come corpora annotati per la presenza di ironia o sarcasmo dallo stato dell'arte. Nel complesso, le prestazioni del nostro sistema sembrano convalidare l'importante ruolo che le informazioni affettive hanno per identificare contenuti ironici su Twitter.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama ValenTO komandos naudojama sistema bendrame uždavinyje „Irony Detection in English Tweets“ SemEval 2018. The system takes as starting point emotIDM, an irony detection model that explores the use of affective features based on a wide range of lexical resources available for English, reflecting different facets of affect.  We experimented with different settings, by exploiting different classifiers and features, and participated both to the binary irony detection task and to the task devoted to distinguish among different types of irony.  Mes pranešame apie mūsų sistemos pasiektus rezultatus tiek ribotoje aplinkoje, tiek neribotoje aplinkoje, kur ištyrėme papildomų duomenų naudojimo mokymo etape poveikį, pvz., corpora anotuota dėl ironijos ar sarkazmo iš pažangiausių technologijų. Apskritai atrodo, kad mūsų sistemos veikimas patvirtina svarbų vaidmenį, kurį daro įtakinga informacija nustatant ironinį turinį Twitter.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз 2018 жылдың SemEval-де Ағылшын Tweets тапсырмасында Валентон тобының қолданылатын жүйесін таңдаймыз. Жүйе ағылшын тілінде қол жеткізетін лекскалық ресурстардың көпшілік аумағына негізделген үлгілерін анықтайтын irony анықтау үлгісі болады. Біз түрлі параметрлермен тәжірибе істеп, түрлі классификациялар мен мүмкіндіктерді қолданып, екеуінде бинарлық ирониялық тапсырманы тапсырмаға және басқа түрлі ирониялық тапсырмаға қатынап Біз жүйеміздің шектелген нәтижелерін және шектелмеген параметрлерде туралы хабарлап бердік. Ол жерде біз қосымша мәліметтерді оқыту фазесінде қолданатын нәтижелерді зерттеп, мысалы, корпораға армандық немесе саркассмы Жалпы, жүйеміздің істеуіміз Твиттерде ирониялық мазмұнын анықтау үшін мәліметтің маңызды рөлін тексеру сияқты.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan sistem yang digunakan oleh pasukan ValenTO dalam tugas berkongsi pada Deteksi Irony dalam Tweets Inggeris di SemEval 2018. Sistem mengambil sebagai titik permulaan emotIDM, model pengesan ironi yang mengeksplorasi penggunaan ciri-ciri afektif berdasarkan julat luas sumber leksikal yang tersedia untuk bahasa Inggeris, mencerminkan sudut-sudut pengaruh yang berbeza. Kami eksperimen dengan tetapan yang berbeza, dengan mengeksploitasi pemikir dan ciri-ciri yang berbeza, dan berpartisipasi kedua-dua pada tugas pengesan ironi binari dan tugas yang ditugaskan untuk membezakan antara jenis ironi yang berbeza. We report on the results obtained by our system both in a constrained setting and unconstrained setting, where we explored the impact of using additional data in the training phase, such as corpora annotated for the presence of irony or sarcasm from the state of the art.  Overall, the performance of our system seems to validate the important role that affective information has for identifying ironic content in Twitter.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാലെന്\u200dറോ ടീമില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല ഇംഗ്ലീഷിന് വേണ്ടി ലഭ്യമായ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പരിഹാസപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന മോഡലാണ്  വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളും വിഭാഗങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, ബൈനറി പരിഹസിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയിലേക്കും പങ്കെടുത്തു. വ്യത്യ We report on the results obtained by our system both in a constrained setting and unconstrained setting, where we explored the impact of using additional data in the training phase, such as corpora annotated for the presence of irony or sarcasm from the state of the art.  സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനം തെളിയിക്കുന്നത് തെളിയിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го опишуваме системот кој го користи тимот Валенто во заедничката задача за идентификација на иронија на англиски твитови на SemEval 2018. Системот зема како почетна точка emotIDM, ирониски детективен модел кој ја истражува употребата на афективни карактеристики базирани на широк опсег на лексички ресурси достапни за англиски, одразувајќи различни аспекти на ефектот. Експериментиравме со различни поставувања, искористувајќи различни класификатори и карактеристики, и учествувавме на бинарната задача за детекција на иронија и задачата посветена на разлика помеѓу различните видови на иронија. Ние известуваме за резултатите постигнати од нашиот систем во ограничено и неограничено седиште, каде го истражувавме влијанието на користењето дополнителни податоци во фазата на тренинг, како што е прикажано капората за присуството на иронија или сарказам од најсовремената технологија. Вкупно, резултатите на нашиот систем се чини дека ја потврдуваат важната улога што влијателните информации ја имаат за идентификување на ироничната содржина на Твитер.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид 2018 оны SemEval-д Валентонто багийнхээ Төмөр нээлттэй ажил дээр ашигласан системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ систем англи хэлний олон хэлбэрээр ашиглах хэлбэрийн боловсруулалтыг судлах зорилготой emotIDM-г эхлэх цэг гэж үздэг. Бид өөр хэлбэрээр туршилт хийж, өөр хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглаж, хоёр давхар аймшигтай байдлын ажил болон өөр төрлийн гайхамшигтай ажилд оролцсон. Бид системээс гарсан үр дүнг хязгаарлагдсан болон хязгааргүй байрлалд мэдээллийг судалж байлаа. Жишээ нь Корпора урлагийн байр суурь дахь галзуу эсвэл сэтгэл хөдлөл байдал дээр нэмэлт мэдээллийг ашиглах нөлөөг судалж байлаа. Бидний системийн үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагаа нь мэдээллийг тодорхойлдохын тулд Твиттерт гайхамшигтай сорилтуудыг тодорхойлдог чухал үүрэг шийдэж байна.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi systemet som ValenTO-gruppa brukar i delt oppgåve om Irony Detection i engelske tweets på semiEval 2018. Systemet tar som startpunktemotIDM, eit ironisk oppdagingsmodell som utforskar bruken av påverka funksjonar basert på eit brett rekkje av leksiske ressursar som er tilgjengelege for engelsk, som reflekserer ulike utskrifter av påverka. Vi eksperimenterte med ulike innstillingar, ved å bruka ulike klassifikatorar og funksjonar, og delta både på det binære ironiske oppgåva og oppgåva som er tilgjengeleg for å distisera mellom ulike typar irony. Vi rapporterer om resultatene som er henta av systemet vårt både i ein begrenset innstilling og ukonstrukt innstilling, der vi utforska effekten av å bruka ekstra data i opplæringsfasen, slik som korpora oppmerkte for tilstand av irony eller sarkasm frå kunsten. Overalt ser ut til at utviklinga av systemet vår er validert den viktige rollen som påvirkar informasjon har for å identifisera ironisk innhald i Twitter.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument niddeskrivu s-sistema użata mit-tim ValenTO fil-kompitu kondiviż dwar id-Detezzjoni tal-Ironja fit-Tweets Ingliżi f’SemEval 2018. Is-sistema tieħu bħala punt tat-tluq emotIDM, mudell ta’ detezzjoni ta’ ironija li jesplora l-użu ta’ karatteristiċi affetttivi bbażati fuq firxa wiesgħa ta’ riżorsi lexiċi disponibbli għall-Ingliż, li jirrifletti aspetti differenti ta’ effett. Esperimentajna b’ambjenti differenti, billi sfruttajna klassifikaturi u karatteristiċi differenti, u pparteċipajna kemm fil-kompitu binarju ta’ individwazzjoni tal-ironija kif ukoll fil-kompitu ddedikat biex jiddistingwi fost tipi differenti ta’ ironija. Aħna nirrappurtaw dwar ir-riżultati miksuba mis-sistema tagħna kemm f’ambjent ristrett kif ukoll f’ambjent mhux ristrett, fejn esplorajna l-impatt tal-użu ta’ dejta addizzjonali fil-fażi tat-taħriġ, bħal corpora annotata għall-preżenza ta’ ironja jew sarkazmu mill-a ħħar. B’mod ġenerali, il-prestazzjoni tas-sistema tagħna tidher li tivvalida r-rwol importanti li l-informazzjoni affetttiva għandha għall-identifikazzjoni tal-kontenut ironiku fuq Twitter.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy system wykorzystywany przez zespół ValenTO w ramach wspólnego zadania "Wykrywanie ironii w angielskich tweetach" na SemEval 2018. System przyjmuje jako punkt wyjścia emotIDM, model wykrywania ironii, który bada wykorzystanie cech afektywnych w oparciu o szeroki zakres zasobów leksykalnych dostępnych dla języka angielskiego, odzwierciedlając różne aspekty efektu. Eksperymentowaliśmy z różnymi ustawieniami, wykorzystując różne klasyfikatory i funkcje, uczestniczyliśmy zarówno w zadaniu detekcji ironii binarnej, jak i w zadaniu poświęconym rozróżnieniu różnych rodzajów ironii. Raportujemy o wynikach uzyskanych przez nasz system zarówno w warunkach ograniczonych, jak i nieograniczonych, gdzie zbadaliśmy wpływ wykorzystania dodatkowych danych w fazie treningu, takich jak korpusy adnotacyjne na obecność ironii czy sarkazmu z najnowocześniejszej techniki. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, wydajność naszego systemu wydaje się potwierdzać ważną rolę, jaką informacje afektywne odgrywają w identyfikacji ironicznych treści na Twitterze.', 'si': 'අපි මේ පත්තරේ වැලෙන්ටෝ කණ්ඩායමේ භාවිතා කරපු පද්ධතිය පැහැදිලි කරනවා 2018 සෙම්වෙල් වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් ව පද්ධතිය පටන්ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය emotIDM විදිහට ගන්නවා, ප්\u200dරතිශීල විශේෂ සැකසුම් භාවිතය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරති අපි වෙනස් සැකසුම් සමඟ පරීක්ෂණය කරලා, වෙනස් විශේෂකය සහ විශේෂකය සමඟ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා, ඒ වගේම බායිනාරි අයිරෝනි පරීක්ෂ අපි පද්ධතියෙන් ගත්ත ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගැන වාර්තා කරනවා අපේ පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නැති සැකසුම් සහ සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා, අපි ප්\u200dර සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම, අපේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පේන විදිහට තියෙන්නේ වැදගත් තොරතුරු තොරතුරු ට්වි', 'ro': 'În această lucrare descriem sistemul utilizat de echipa ValenTO în sarcina comună privind Detectarea Ironiei în Tweets în limba engleză la SemEval 2018. Sistemul ia ca punct de plecare emotIDM, un model de detectare a ironiei care explorează utilizarea caracteristicilor afective bazate pe o gamă largă de resurse lexicale disponibile pentru limba engleză, reflectând diferite fațete ale afectului. Am experimentat diferite setări, prin exploatarea diferitelor clasificări și caracteristici, și am participat atât la sarcina de detectare a ironiei binare, cât și la sarcina dedicată distingerii între diferite tipuri de ironie. Raportăm rezultatele obținute de sistemul nostru atât într-un cadru constrâns, cât și într-un cadru fără constrângeri, unde am explorat impactul utilizării de date suplimentare în faza de formare, cum ar fi corporele adnotate pentru prezența ironiei sau sarcasmului de ultimă generație. În general, performanța sistemului nostru pare să valideze rolul important pe care îl are informațiile afective în identificarea conținutului ironic în Twitter.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa nidaamka ay kooxda ValenTO ku isticmaaleen shaqada la qaybsan ku saabsan baaritaanka ajaaniyadda ee Ingiriis ee ku qoran Tweetka ee SemEval 2018. Isticmaalku wuxuu u baaraandegaa qaab imtixaanka IDM oo bilowga ah, qaab aad u fiirista isticmaalka faa’iido leh oo ku saleysan isticmaalka midhaha leksikal oo kala duduwan ee luuqada Ingiriiska lagu heli karo, iyadoo ku sawiraya wejiyada kala duduwan oo saameyn ku leh. Waxaannu ku jirrabnay habooyin kala duduwan, si aan ugu isticmaalno fasalayaasha kala duduwan iyo waxyaabaha, waxaana ka qeybqaadanay shaqo la garto xilliga labaad iyo shaqo la xiriira si loo kala soocayo noocyo kala duduwan oo jacayl ah. Waxaannu wargelinaynaa arimaha ay nidaamkayaga ka heleen, marka aan saameyn u baarayno isticmaalka macluumaadka dheeraad ah ee fasalka waxbarashada, sida shirkadda ku dhibaataysa in ay ka yimaadaan xaaladda farshaxanka ka ka yimaado iroqo ama sarsarkism. Dhammaan, muuqashada nidaamka waxaa loola jeedaa inuu xaqiijiyo qaybaha muhiimka ah oo macluumaadka saameyn ku leh aqoonsashada waxyaabaha ironicka ee Twitterka.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem koji je koristio tim Valentova u zajedničkom zadatku o detekciji Ironija na engleskim Tweets na semiEvalu 2018. Sistem uzima kao emotIDM na početnoj tački, ironički model otkrivanja koji istražuje korištenje utjecajnih karakteristika na osnovu širokog rasporeda leksičkih resursa dostupnih za engleski jezik, koji odražava različite lica utjecaja. Eksperimentirali smo sa različitim postavkama, iskorištavajući različite klasifikatore i karakteristike, i učestvovali u dvojnom zadatku otkrivanja ironija i zadatku posvećenom da razlikujemo različite vrste ironija. Prijavljujemo rezultate koji su dobili naš sistem i u ograničenom stanju i bez ograničenja, gde smo istražili učinak korištenja dodatnih podataka u fazi obuke, kao što je korpora annotirana za prisustvo ironije ili sarkazma iz stanja umjetnosti. Uglavnom, provedba našeg sistema izgleda da potvrđuje važnu ulogu koja utječe na informacije za identifikaciju ironičkog sadržaja na Twitter.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi det system som ValenTO-teamet använde i den delade uppgiften om Irony Detection in English Tweets på SemEval 2018. Systemet tar som utgångspunkt emotIDM, en modell för ironidetektering som utforskar användningen av affektiva funktioner baserat på ett brett utbud av lexikala resurser tillgängliga för engelska, vilket återspeglar olika aspekter av påverkan. Vi experimenterade med olika inställningar, genom att utnyttja olika klassificerare och funktioner, och deltog både i den binära ironidetekteringsuppgiften och i den uppgift som ägnades åt att skilja mellan olika typer av ironi. Vi rapporterar om de resultat som erhållits av vårt system både i en begränsad miljö och obegränsad miljö, där vi undersökte effekten av att använda ytterligare data i träningsfasen, såsom corpora kommenterade för förekomsten av ironi eller sarkasm från den senaste tekniken. Sammantaget verkar prestandan i vårt system bekräfta den viktiga roll som affektiv information har för att identifiera ironiskt innehåll i Twitter.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ویلنٹو تیم کے ذریعہ استعمال کی سیسٹم کو نصمیل 2018 میں انگلیسی ٹویٹوں میں آئرونی اچانک کے بارے میں شریک کار میں بیان کرتے ہیں۔ سیسٹم کو شروع پوینٹ ایموٹ ایڈم کے طور پر لیتا ہے، ایک ایرونی اچانک موڈل جو انگلیسی کے لئے موجود لکسیکل سروسیلوں کی وسیع طریقہ پر استعمال کرتا ہے، جو انگلیسی کے متعلق مختلف چہروں کی تفسیر کرتا ہے. ہم نے مختلف تنظیمات کے ساتھ آزمائش کی، مختلف کلاسپیر اور فکرتوں کے مطابق استعمال کی، اور دونوں بائیناری ایرونی شناسی کا کام اور مختلف طریقوں کے درمیان اختلاف کرنے کے لئے مشارکت کی۔ ہم نے اپنے سیسٹم کے نتائج کے بارے میں گزارے ہیں ایک محدودیت اور بغیر محدودیت میں، جہاں ہم نے اضافہ دکھانے کے مطابق اضافہ دکھانے کی تاثیر دیکھی ہے، جیسے کورپورا، آهنگ کی حالت سے اضافہ یا سارکاسم کے مطابق اضافہ کیا گیا ہے۔ ہمارے سیستم کی عملکرد اس طرح کی تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ اس کے اثر حصہ کو جو توئیٹر میں اثر دینے والی معلومات کے لئے اثر دیتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் வாலென்டோவ் குழு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறைமையை விவரிக்கிறோம் செம்வால் 2018-ல் பங்கிடைக்கப்பட்ட ஈரின்  The system takes as starting point emotIDM, an irony detection model that explores the use of affective features based on a wide range of lexical resources available for English, reflecting different facets of affect.  வேறு வகுப்பாளர்களையும் தன்மைகளையும் பயன்படுத்தி இருந்து வின்வேறு செயல்களையும் பங்கிட்டோம். வேறு வகுப்புகளையும் வேறுபாடுகளையும் வேறுபட நாங்கள் எங்கள் கணினியின் முடிவுகளை பற்றி அறிவிக்கிறோம் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட அமைப்புகளில் மற்றும் முடியாத அமைப்பில், அதில் நாங்கள் கூடுதல் தகவலை பயன்படுத்தும் பயி மொத்தத்தில், எங்கள் கணினியின் செயல்பாடு தெரியும் முக்கியமான விளையாட்டை தெரியும் என்று தெரிகிறது தெரியும்', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz SemEval 2018-da birlashtirilgan Iron Tasdiqlash vazifasida ValenTO guruhi ishlatilgan tizimni anglatamiz. Name Biz har xil moslamalar bilan, har xil sinfni va xususiyatlarni foydalanish bilan o'tibor berdik, va ikkita ironisi qidirish vazifasiga qayta ishlashdik va har xil turlarini o'zgartirish uchun ishni o'zgartirdiк. We report on the results obtained by our system both in a constrained setting and unconstrained setting, where we explored the impact of using additional data in the training phase, such as corpora annotated for the presence of irony or sarcasm from the state of the art.  Umumiy, bizning tizimimizning bajarishi Twitterdagi ironik tarkibini aniqlash uchun muhim vazifani to ʻgʻri beradi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống dùng bởi đội quay ValenTO trong nhiệm vụ chia sẻ "trinh sát mỉa mai" bằng tiếng Anh Tweet tại SemEvl 208. Hệ thống là điểm khởi đầu của cảm xúc IDM, một mô hình phát hiện mỉa mai nghiên cứu việc sử dụng các tính năng tác động dựa trên một loạt các nguồn ngôn ngữ từ có sẵn cho người Anh, phản ánh các khía cạnh khác nhau của tác động. Chúng tôi đã thử nghiệm với các thiết lập khác nhau, bằng cách khai thác các phân loại và các tính năng khác nhau, và tham gia cả vào nhiệm vụ tìm ra các loại hình tượng trớ trêu nhị phân biệt nhau. Chúng tôi báo cáo về kết quả của hệ thống, cả trong một giới hạn và chưa được huấn luyện, nơi chúng tôi đã khám phá tác động của việc sử dụng thêm dữ liệu trong giai đoạn huấn luyện, như thể có ghi chú về sự hiện diện của sự trớ trêu hay mỉa mai từ trạng thái nghệ thuật. Cách làm việc của hệ thống dường như xác nhận vai trò quan trọng của những thông tin ảnh hưởng để xác định nội dung trớ trêu trên Twitter.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we het systeem dat het ValenTO-team gebruikt in de gedeelde taak Irony Detection in English Tweets op SemEval 2018. Het systeem neemt als uitgangspunt emotIDM, een ironie detectie model dat het gebruik van affectieve functies onderzoekt op basis van een breed scala aan lexicale bronnen beschikbaar voor het Engels, die verschillende facetten van affect weerspiegelen. We experimenteerden met verschillende instellingen, door gebruik te maken van verschillende classificatoren en functies, en namen deel aan zowel de binaire ironie detectie taak als aan de taak gewijd aan het onderscheiden van verschillende soorten ironie. We rapporteren over de resultaten verkregen door ons systeem zowel in een beperkte setting als in een onbeperkte setting, waar we de impact onderzocht hebben van het gebruik van aanvullende gegevens in de trainingsfase, zoals corpora geannoteerd voor de aanwezigheid van ironie of sarcasme uit de stand van de techniek. Over het algemeen lijkt de prestaties van ons systeem de belangrijke rol te bevestigen die affectieve informatie heeft bij het identificeren van ironische inhoud in Twitter.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме системата, използвана от екипа на ВаленТО в споделената задача за откриване на ирония в английски туитове на СемЕвал 2018. Системата взема като отправна точка модел за откриване на ирония, който изследва използването на афективни функции въз основа на широк спектър от лексикални ресурси, достъпни за английски език, отразяващи различни аспекти на афекта. Експериментирахме с различни настройки, използвайки различни класификатори и функции и участвахме както в задачата за откриване на двоична ирония, така и в задачата, посветена на разграничаване между различните видове ирония. Докладваме за резултатите, получени от нашата система както в ограничена обстановка, така и в неограничена обстановка, където изследваме въздействието от използването на допълнителни данни във фазата на обучение, като корпуси, анотирани за наличие на ирония или сарказъм от най-съвременните технологии. Като цяло ефективността на нашата система изглежда потвърждава важната роля, която афективната информация има за идентифицирането на ироничното съдържание в Туитър.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem koji je koristio tim ValenTO-a u zajedničkom zadatku o detekciji Ironija na engleskim Tweets na semiEvalu 2018. Sistem uzima kao emotIDM iz početne tačke, model za otkrivanje ironija koji istražuje uporabu utjecajnih karakteristika na temelju širokog rasporeda leksičkih resursa dostupnih za engleski, koji odražava različite lica utjecaja. Eksperimentirali smo s različitim postavkama, iskorištavajući različite klasifikatore i karakteristike, i učestvovali u zadatku za otkrivanje binarne ironija i zadatku posvećenom različitim vrstama ironija. Prijavljujemo rezultate koji su dobili naš sustav i u ograničenom stanju i neograničenom stanju, gdje smo istražili učinak korištenja dodatnih podataka u fazi obuke, kao što je tijelo annotirano za prisustvo ironije ili sarkazma iz stanja umjetnosti. Uopće, provedba našeg sustava izgleda potvrđuje važnu ulogu koja utječe na utjecajne informacije za identifikaciju ironičkog sadržaja na Twitter-u.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi det system, ValenTO-teamet brugte i den fælles opgave om Irony Detection in English Tweets på SemEval 2018. Systemet tager som udgangspunkt emotIDM, en ironidetektionsmodel, der udforsker brugen af affektive funktioner baseret på en bred vifte af leksikalske ressourcer til rådighed for engelsk, der afspejler forskellige facetter af affect. Vi eksperimenterede med forskellige indstillinger, ved at udnytte forskellige klassificeringer og funktioner, og deltog både i opgaven med binær ironi detektering og i opgaven dedikeret til at skelne mellem forskellige typer ironi. Vi rapporterer om resultaterne opnået af vores system både i et begrænset miljø og ubegrænset miljø, hvor vi undersøgte effekten af at bruge yderligere data i træningsfasen, såsom corpora kommenteret for tilstedeværelsen af ironi eller sarkasme fra den nyeste teknologi. Alt i alt synes vores systems ydeevne at validere den vigtige rolle, som affektive oplysninger har for at identificere ironisk indhold i Twitter.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir das System, das das ValenTO-Team in der gemeinsamen Aufgabe Irony Detection in English Tweets bei SemEval 2018 verwendet. Das System nimmt als Ausgangspunkt emotIDM, ein Ironie-Erkennungsmodell, das die Verwendung von affektiven Funktionen untersucht, basierend auf einer breiten Palette von lexikalischen Ressourcen, die für Englisch verfügbar sind, und verschiedene Facetten des Affekts widerspiegelt. Wir experimentierten mit verschiedenen Einstellungen, indem wir verschiedene Klassifikatoren und Features nutzten, und beteiligten uns sowohl an der binären Ironie-Erkennungsaufgabe als auch an der Aufgabe, zwischen verschiedenen Ironie-Typen zu unterscheiden. Wir berichten über die von unserem System erzielten Ergebnisse sowohl in einem eingeschränkten als auch in einem ungehinderten Rahmen, wo wir die Auswirkungen der Verwendung zusätzlicher Daten in der Trainingsphase untersuchten, wie Korpora, die auf das Vorhandensein von Ironie oder Sarkasmus aus dem Stand der Technik annotiert wurden. Insgesamt scheint die Leistung unseres Systems die wichtige Rolle zu bestätigen, die affektive Information bei der Identifizierung ironischer Inhalte in Twitter spielt.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 발렌토 팀이 2018년 SemEval 영어 트윗 반풍 검출 공유 임무에 사용한 시스템을 묘사했다.이 시스템은 emotid를 출발점으로 하고 emotid는 일종의 반풍 검측 모델로 영어에서 광범위한 어휘 자원을 바탕으로 감정 특징의 사용을 탐색하고 감정의 다양한 측면을 반영한다.우리는 서로 다른 분류기와 특징을 이용하여 서로 다른 환경에서 실험을 하고 이원반풍 검측 임무와 서로 다른 유형의 반풍을 구분하는 임무에 참여한다.우리는 우리의 시스템이 제한된 환경과 비제한된 환경에서 얻은 결과를 보고했다. 그 중에서 우리는 훈련 단계에서 추가 데이터를 사용하는 영향, 예를 들어 최신 기술에 따라 풍자나 풍자의 존재를 주석하는 자료 라이브러리를 연구했다.전체적으로 우리 시스템의 성능은 트위터의 풍자 내용을 식별하는 데 감정 정보의 중요한 역할을 검증한 것 같다.', 'id': 'In this paper we describe the system used by the ValenTO team in the shared task on Irony Detection in English Tweets at SemEval 2018.  Sistem ini mengambil sebagai titik awal emotIDM, model deteksi ironi yang mengeksplorasi penggunaan karakteristik afektif berdasarkan jangkauan lebar sumber daya leksik yang tersedia untuk bahasa Inggris, merefleksikan aspek efek yang berbeda. Kami eksperimen dengan pengaturan yang berbeda, dengan mengeksploitasi klasifikasi dan fitur yang berbeda, dan berpartisipasi pada tugas deteksi ironi binari dan tugas yang ditujukan untuk membedakan antara jenis ironi yang berbeda. Kami melaporkan tentang hasil yang diperoleh oleh sistem kami baik dalam keadaan terhalang dan keadaan tidak terhalang, di mana kami mengeksplorasi dampak dari menggunakan data tambahan dalam fase latihan, seperti corpora yang dicatat untuk kehadiran ironi atau sarkasme dari state of the art. Secara umum, prestasi sistem kita tampaknya mengkvalifikasi peran penting yang memiliki informasi afektif untuk mengidentifikasi isi ironis di Twitter.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili tunaelezea mfumo uliotumiwa na timu ya ValenTO katika jukumu la kushirikiana kwenye Uchunguzi wa Kiingereza kwa Twita za SemEval 2018. Mfumo unachukua kama mwanzo wa hisia za IDM, modeli ya uchunguzi wa kejeli inayotafuta matumizi ya vipengele vya athari kwa kutumia rasilimali nyingi za lexico zinazopatikana kwa Kiingereza, ikionyesha sura tofauti za madhara. Tulijaribu kwa mazingira tofauti, kwa kutumia wataalamu na tabia tofauti, na kushiriki katika kazi ya uchunguzi wa kejeli binafsi na kwa jukumu lililohusiana na kutofautisha kati ya aina tofauti za kejeli. Tunatoa taarifa juu ya matokeo yaliyopatikana na mfumo wetu wote katika mazingira ya msingi na isiyo na ukomo, ambapo tulitafuta athari ya kutumia taarifa za ziada katika hatua ya mafunzo, kama vile kampuni iliyochangaza kwa kuwepo kwa kejeli au kejeli kutoka kwenye hali ya sanaa. Kwa ujumla, utendaji wa mfumo wetu unaonekana kuwa umethibitisha jukumu muhimu ambalo taarifa zinazoathiri ni kwa kutambua maudhui ya kejeli kwenye mtandao wa Twita.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ سیستم که توسط تیم ولنتونو استفاده می\u200cشود در کار مشترک در مورد بازرسی آهنی در تویت انگلیسی در نیمه اول ۲۰۱۸ توصیف می\u200cکنیم. سیستم به عنوان نقطه ابتدایی emotIDM، یک مدل شناسایی مسخره که استفاده از ویژه های تاثیر بر اساس یک مجموعه از منابع های زبانی که برای انگلیسی موجود هستند، تحقیق می کند. ما با تنظیمات مختلف آزمایش کردیم، با استفاده از مختلف گروه\u200cهای مختلف و ویژه\u200cهای مختلف، و هر دو به کار شناسایی مسخره\u200cی دویینی و به کار مشغول برای جدایی بین نوع مسخره\u200cهای مختلف شرکت کردیم. ما در مورد نتیجه\u200cهایی که توسط سیستم\u200cمان در یک تنظیم محدودیت و غیرمحدودیت یافته\u200cایم گزارش می\u200cدهیم، جایی که تاثیر استفاده از داده\u200cهای اضافی در مرحله آموزش تحقیق کرده\u200cایم، مانند شرکت که برای حضور آهنگی یا سارکاسم از وضعیت هنر آشکار شده است. عملکرد سیستم ما به نظر می رسد نقش مهمی که اطلاعات تاثیر می دهد برای شناسایی محتوای مسخره در توئیتر است.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz ValenTO toparynyň 2018-nji ýylda Iňlisçe Tweets'de Irony tanyşynda ulanylan sistemany tassykladyk. Sistem emotIDM başlangyç nokady görýär, iňlisçe üçin meýdança faýllaryň ullanyşyny gözleýän gürrüňli hasaplanjak nusgasyna görýär. Biz farklı düzümler bilen synanyşdyrdyk, farklı klasifikalary we özelliklerini ulanarak, we ikisi de binary kirli tanyş täblisine we farklı dökümleriň arasynda tapawutlamak üçin paýlandyrdyk. Biz sistemamyzyň ýüzüne mümkin we çyglanmaýan düzümlerde bolan netijeleri barada ýazylýarys. Şol ýerde, okuwçylyk phasesinda özümiziň daly maglumatlary ulanmakyň täsirini, ýaly korpora ýa-da sungatyň durumyndan a ýdylýan hasaplanýar. Munuň ýagdaýynda, sistemamyzyň tapylygynyň Twitter-da ýüregi maksadyny tanamak üçin nähili möhüm täsirini takyklaýan ýaly görünýär.", 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons die stelsel wat deur die Valento-team gebruik word in die gedeelde taak op Irony-beskrywing in Engelske Tweets by SemEval 2018. Die stelsel neem as begin punt emotIDM, 'n ironiese opdekking model wat uitsoek die gebruik van effektiewe funksies gebaseer op 'n wyse reek van leksiese hulpbronne beskikbaar vir Engels, reflekteer verskillende aangesigte van effekte. Ons het eksperimenteer met verskillende instellings, deur verskillende klassifiseerders en funksies te gebruik, en beide gedeel het aan die binêre ironie-opskrywing taak en aan die taak gespesifiseer om onder verskillende tipes ironie te verskille. Ons rapporteer op die resultate wat deur ons stelsel ontvang word, albeit in 'n beperkte instelling en onbeheinde instelling, waar ons ondersoek het die invloek van addisionele data gebruik in die onderwerp fase, soos korpora aangeteken vir die voorsiening van ironie of sarkasm van die staat van die kuns. Die prestasie van ons stelsel lyk dat die belangrike rol wat afvloek inligting het om ironiese inhoud in Twitter te identifiseer.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne përshkruajmë sistemin e përdorur nga ekipi ValenTO në detyrën e përbashkët për zbulimin e ironisë në Tweets angleze në SemEval 2018. Sistemi merr si pikë fillimi emotIDM, një model zbulimi ironik që eksploron përdorimin e karakteristikave afektive bazuar në një gamë të gjerë burimesh lexike të disponueshme për anglishtin, duke pasqyruar aspekte të ndryshme të ndikimit. Eksperimentuam me rregullime të ndryshme, duke shfrytëzuar klasifikuesit dhe karakteristikat e ndryshme, dhe morëm pjesë në detyrën e zbulimit të ironisë binare dhe në detyrën e përkushtuar për të dalluar midis llojeve të ndryshme të ironisë. We report on the results obtained by our system both in a constrained setting and unconstrained setting, where we explored the impact of using additional data in the training phase, such as corpora annotated for the presence of irony or sarcasm from the state of the art.  Në përgjithësi, performanca e sistemit tonë duket të vlerësojë rolin e rëndësishëm që informacioni afektiv ka për identifikimin e përmbajtjes ironike në Twitter.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች ላይ በቻሎንቴዎ ቡድን የተጠቀመውን የኢዮኒ ምርጫን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሲስተምሩ የኢንተርኔት ስህተት IDM መጀመሪያ እንደሚያሳየው፣ የልዩ ፊቶችን በመመለከት የልዩ ደረጃ የሌክሲካዊ ሀብትን በመጠቀም የሚችል የስሕተት ምርጫዎችን የሚያሳውቅ ምሳሌ ነው፡፡ በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች፣ ልዩ ተቃውሞዎችን እና ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም፣ ለብያዊ የኢኮኖኒ ስራ እና በተለያዩ ዓይነቶች መካከል ለመለየት ለስራ ተጋርተናል፡፡ በሥርዓታችን ፍሬዎችን በተገኘበት ግድ እና ያልተቋረጥ አካሄድ ላይ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በሙሉ፣ የስርዓታችን ውጤት በትዊተር ውስጥ የፀሐይ መረጃን ለማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'az': "Bu kağıtda, 2018-ci SemEval'də İsrail Tövetlərində Irony Detection'da ValenTO takımının istifadə edilən sistemi təsdiqləyirik. Sistem başlanğıç noktası emotIDM kimi qəbul edir, İngilizce üçün müxtəlif təsirlərin üzərini təşkil edir. Biz müxtəlif qurğular ilə imtahana çəkdik, müxtəlif klassifiyarları və fərqli tərzlərini istifadə edərək, ikinci ironi tanıtma işinə və fərqli ironi tərzlərinin arasında ayırmaq üçün müəyyən edilən işə də katıldıq. Biz sistemimizin müəyyən edilmiş və müəyyən edilməmiş bir yerdə, həmçin in öyrənmə fəzində həmçinin art ıq məlumatlarını istifadə etmək təsiri ilə istifadə etdiyimiz sonuçları barəsində xəbər veririk. Əlbəttə, sistemimizin istifadəsi Twitter içində ironiq məlumatını tanıtmaq üçün olan möhkəm məlumatı təsdiqləyən kimidir.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք այն համակարգը, որը օգտագործվել է ՎալենԹո թիմի կողմից 2018 թվականի "Սեմեվալ" անգլերեն թվիթերում հանրային հանձնարարության մեջ: Համակարգը որպես սկզբնական կետ է ընդունում EmoIDM-ը, մի հեգնական հայտնաբերման մոդել, որը ուսումնասիրում է աֆեկտիվ հատկությունների օգտագործումը, հիմնված անգլերենի համար հասանելի լեքսիկական ռեսուրսների լայն տարբերակի վրա, արտացո Մենք փորձարկում էինք տարբեր միջոցներով, օգտագործելով տարբեր դասակարգումներ և հատկություններ, և մասնակցեցինք երկարագույն հեղինակության հայտնաբերման խնդիրներին, ինչպես նաև հեղինակության տարբեր տեսակների տարբերակելու խնդիրներին: We report on the results obtained by our system both in a constrained setting and unconstrained setting, where we explored the impact of using additional data in the training phase, such as corpora annotated for the presence of irony or sarcasm from the state of the art.  Ընդհանուր առմամբ, մեր համակարգի արտադրողությունը կարծես հաստատում է այն կարևոր դերը, որ ազդեցիկ ինֆորմացիան ունի Թվիթերում հեգնական պարունակության հայտնաբերման համար:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ভ্যালেন্টো টিম ব্যবহার করেছি যেটি ব্যবহার করেছে সেমইভাল ২০১৮-এ ইংরেজী টুইটারে শেয়ার করা আইনিক ডিটেকশনের উপর। এই সিস্টেম শুরু করা বিন্দু অনুভূতি হিসেবে গ্রহণ করে, একটি বিদ্রূপ সনাক্ত মডেল যা ইংরেজীর জন্য বিস্তৃত লেক্সিক্যাল সম্পদের ভিত্তিতে প্রভাবিত বিভি আমরা বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে পরীক্ষা করেছি, বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন শ্রেণীদের ব্যবহার করে এবং বাইনারি পরিহাসের কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছি এবং বি আমরা আমাদের সিস্টেমের ফলাফল সম্পর্কে রিপোর্ট করি বাধ্যতামূলক সংস্থায় এবং অশ্লীল সংস্থায়, যেখানে আমরা প্রশিক্ষণ পর্যায়ে আরো তথ্য ব্যবহারের প্রভাব ব ব্যবহার করি, যেমন কর্পো সাধারণত, আমাদের সিস্টেমের প্রভাবের কাজের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা বৈধ করা মনে হচ্ছে যে টুইটারে প্রভাবিত তথ্যের ব', 'ca': "En aquest article descrivim el sistema utilitzat per l'equip ValenTO en la tasca compartida sobre la detecció d'ironia en Tweets anglesos a SemEval 2018. El sistema té com punt de partida emotIDM, un model de detecció d'ironia que explora l'ús de característiques afectives basats en una gran gama de recursos lèxics disponibles per anglès, reflexionant diferents aspectes d'afecte. Hem experimentat amb diferents configuracions, explotant diferents classificadors i característiques, i vam participar tant a la tasca binaria de detecció d'ironia com a la tasca dedicada a distingir entre diferents tipus d'ironia. Informem sobre els resultats obtinguts pel nostre sistema tant en un entorn restringit com en un entorn sense restriccions, on vam explorar l'impacte de l'utilització de dades adicionals en la fase d'entrenament, com la corpora anotata per la presença d'ironia o sarcasme de l'estat de l'art. En general, el rendiment del nostre sistema sembla validar el paper important que la informació afectiva té per identificar continguts irònics a Twitter.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem koji je koristio tim ValenTO-a u zajedničkom zadatku o detekciji Ironija na engleskim Tweets na semiEvalu 2018. Sistem uzima kao emotIDM iz početne tačke, model za otkrivanje ironija koji istražuje korištenje utjecajnih karakteristika na osnovu širokog opsega leksičkih resursa dostupnih za engleski, koji odražava različite lica utjecaja. Eksperimentirali smo sa različitim postavkama, iskorištavajući različite klasifikatore i karakteristike, i učestvovali u zadatku binarne ironije i zadatku posvećenom da se razlikuju među različitim vrstama ironije. Prijavljujemo rezultate koji su dobili naš sistem i u ograničenom stanju i bez ograničenja, gdje smo istražili učinak korištenja dodatnih podataka u fazi obuke, kao što je korpora annotirana za prisustvo ironije ili sarkazma iz stanja umjetnosti. Uglavnom, izvođenje našeg sustava izgleda da potvrđuje važnu ulogu koja utječe na utjecajne informacije za identifikaciju ironičkog sadržaja na Twitter.', 'et': 'Selles töös kirjeldame süsteemi, mida ValenTO meeskond kasutas ühises ülesandes Irony Detection inglise tweets SemEval 2018. Süsteem võtab lähtepunktiks emotIDM, iroonia tuvastamise mudeli, mis uurib afektiivsete funktsioonide kasutamist, mis põhinevad paljudel inglise keeles kättesaadavatel leksikaalsetel ressurssidel, peegeldades efekti erinevaid tahke. Eksperimenteerisime erinevate seadistustega, kasutades ära erinevaid klassifitseerijaid ja funktsioone ning osalesime nii binaarse iroonia tuvastamise ülesandes kui ka erinevate irooniatüüpide eristamisel pühendatud ülesandes. Raporteerime oma süsteemi poolt saadud tulemustest nii piiratud kui ka piiramatus tingimustes, kus uurisime täiendavate andmete kasutamise mõju treeningfaasis, näiteks korpused, mis on märgitud iroonia või sarkasmi olemasolu kohta tehnika tasemel. Kokkuvõttes näib meie süsteemi toimivus kinnitavat, kui oluline roll on afektiivsel teabel iroonilise sisu tuvastamisel Twitteris.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme systém používaný týmem ValenTO ve sdíleném úkolu Detekce ironie v anglických tweetech na SemEvalu 2018. Systém bere jako výchozí bod emotIDM, model detekce ironie, který zkoumá využití afektivních funkcí založených na široké škále lexikálních zdrojů dostupných pro angličtinu, odrážející různé aspekty efektu. Experimentovali jsme s různými nastaveními, využitím různých klasifikátorů a funkcí a podíleli se jak na úkolu detekce binární ironie, tak na úkolu věnovaném rozlišování různých typů ironie. Výsledky získané naším systémem zpracováváme jak v omezeném prostředí, tak v neomezeném prostředí, kde jsme zkoumali dopad využití dalších dat v tréninkové fázi, jako jsou korpusy anotované pro přítomnost ironie nebo sarkasmu ze stavu techniky. Celkově se zdá, že výkonnost našeho systému potvrzuje důležitou roli, kterou afektivní informace hrají při identifikaci ironického obsahu na Twitteru.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan ValenTO-tiimin käyttämää järjestelmää jaetussa tehtävässä Irony Detection in English Tweets SemEval 2018 -tapahtumassa. Järjestelmä ottaa lähtökohdaksi emotIDM:n, ironian havaitsemismallin, joka tutkii affektiivisten ominaisuuksien käyttöä, joka perustuu laajaan englanninkieliseen sanastoon ja heijastaa affektin eri puolia. Kokeilimme erilaisia asetuksia hyödyntämällä eri luokittelijoita ja ominaisuuksia ja osallistuimme sekä binaarisen ironian havaitsemiseen että erilaisten ironiatyyppien erottamiseen. Raportoimme järjestelmän aikaansaamista tuloksista sekä rajoitetussa että rajattomassa ympäristössä, jossa tutkimme lisädatan käytön vaikutusta harjoitteluvaiheessa, kuten corporan, joka on merkitty modernin ironian tai sarkasmin esiintymiseen. Kaiken kaikkiaan järjestelmämme suorituskyky näyttää vahvistavan affektiivisen tiedon tärkeän roolin ironisen sisällön tunnistamisessa Twitterissä.', 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo sistem, ki ga je ekipa ValenTO uporabljala pri skupni nalogi o odkrivanju ironije v angleških tweetih na SemEvalu 2018. Sistem vzame kot izhodišče emotIDM, model za odkrivanje ironije, ki raziskuje uporabo afektivnih funkcij, ki temelji na širokem naboru leksikalnih virov, ki so na voljo za angleščino, in odraža različne vidike afektiva. Eksperimentirali smo z različnimi nastavitvami, z izkoriščanjem različnih klasifikatorjev in funkcij ter sodelovali tako pri nalogi odkrivanja binarne ironije kot pri nalogi, namenjeni razlikovanju med različnimi vrstami ironije. Poročamo o rezultatih našega sistema tako v omejenem kot neomejenem okolju, kjer smo raziskali vpliv uporabe dodatnih podatkov v fazi treninga, kot so korpusi z oznakami prisotnosti ironije ali sarkazma iz najsodobnejšega stanja. Na splošno se zdi, da učinkovitost našega sistema potrjuje pomembno vlogo afektivnih informacij pri prepoznavanju ironične vsebine v Twitterju.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki, kita ngubah sistem sing nggawe perintah sing koyo bengko karo hal-hal nganggo mulai nggawe barang-alakno ning Inggris Sistem teka ono nggo mobil omotID, model neng dadi nggunakake iso nggawe nguasai peringatan pakan sing nyimpen ning daerahé akeh luwih akeh perusahaan langgambar kanggo ingkang, myaket iso nggambar aturan sing paling maneh. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggambar aturan pilihan, lan nggawe layang-layang karo sak layang, lan sekolah dumadhi iki dadi kebutuhang awak dhéwé sing alih dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe aturan sing paling dhéwé, kuwi jenis-jenis awak dhéwé uga sing Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan winih kanggo nguasai sistèm dhéwé, ngono hal-hal nggawe nguasai perusahaan dadi tambah nggawe nguasai perusahaan winih dhéwé, koyo ngono perusahaan sing berarti nggawe winih dhéwé Kayané, gawe sistem sing paling nggambar deweke nggawe barang nggawe informasi sing gak bener kanggo ngerasakno kontoh irno ning Google.', 'he': 'In this paper we describe the system used by the ValenTO team in the shared task on Irony Detection in English Tweets at SemEval 2018.  The system takes as starting point emotIDM, an irony detection model that explores the use of affective features based on a wide range of lexical resources available for English, reflecting different facets of affect.  ניסונו עם סדרות שונות, על ידי ניצל מסמכים ומאפיינים שונים, ושתתפנו גם למשימת גילוי אירוניה בינרית וגם למשימה הקדשה להבחין בין סוגים שונים של אירוניה. אנו מדווחים על התוצאות שנקבלו על ידי המערכת שלנו גם בסביבה מוגבלת ובסביבה לא מוגבלת, שבו חקרנו את ההשפעה של השימוש בנתונים נוספים בשלב האימונים, כמו הקופורה המכתבת לנוכחות אירוניה או סרקזם ממצב האמנות. באופן כללי, נראה שהביצועים של המערכת שלנו מאשרים את התפקיד החשוב שיש לו מידע משפיע לזהות תוכן אירוני בטוויטר.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག དེ་ནི་མ་ལག་གིས་འགོ་བཙུགས་པའི་emotIDM་ལྟར་བློ་གཏོང་ནུས་པའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་མ་འདྲ་བ་ལས་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་ཆ་ཁྱད་པོ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་གྲངས་རྩིས་བྱས་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ན། We report on the results obtained by our system both in a constrained setting and unconstrained setting, where we explored the impact of using additional data in the training phase, such as corpora annotated for the presence of irony or sarcasm from the state of the art. ཡིན་བཟུང་། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་བྱ་སྟངས་ནི་ཌིས་ཌིར་ནང་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཆགས་ཡོད་པ་དང་།', 'ha': "Daga wannan takarda, Munã bayyana na'urar tsarin wanda the team of the WalenTO ke amfani da shi cikin shirin aikin da aka raba Iron Garaminci a cikin Ingiriya Twitter at Semeval 2018. The system takes as starting point emotIDM, an irony detection model that explores the use of affective features based on a wide range of lexical resources available for English, reflecting different facets of affect.  Kuma Muka jarraba su da wasu kewayi dabam-dabam, da za mu yi amfani da su fassar-daban dabam, kuma mun yi rabo zuwa ga aikin na gannair jeri da kuma zuwa ga aikin da za'a rarrabe su daga wasu irin na izni. Tuna buga lãbãri game da matsala waɗand a aka samar da na'urarmu, a cikin shirin tsari da ba'a taƙaita ba, a inda muka yi amfani da wasu data masu ƙaranci cikin fassarar mafarako, kamar makampuni da aka yi wa zartar da shi daga halin sanar. Haƙĩƙa, aikin na'uranmu yana kasa gaskata rolin da ke da muhimu masu haɗi information na da wa'anar da maɓallin jerin a Twitter."}
{'en': 'NewsReader at SemEval-2018 Task 5 : Counting events by reasoning over event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'ar': 'NewsReader في SemEval-2018 المهمة 5: عد الأحداث من خلال التفكير في الرسوم البيانية للمعرفة التي تركز على الحدث', 'fr': 'NewsReader à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 5\xa0: Compter les événements en raisonnant sur des graphes de connaissances centrés sur les événements', 'es': 'Lector de noticias en SemeVal-2018 Tarea 5: Contar eventos por razonamiento sobre gráficos de conocimiento centrados en eventos', 'pt': 'NewsReader no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 5: Contando eventos raciocinando sobre gráficos de conhecimento centrados em eventos', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク5のNewsReader ：イベント中心のナレッジグラフで推論してイベントをカウントする', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018之新闻阅读器事5:推理以事为心图来计事', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 5 पर NewsReader: घटना-केंद्रित-ज्ञान-रेखांकन पर तर्क करके घटनाओं की गिनती', 'ru': 'NewsReader на SemEval-2018 Задача 5: Подсчет событий по рассуждениям о событиях-ориентированных графах знаний', 'ga': 'Léitheoir Nuachta ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 5: Imeachtaí a chomhaireamh trí réasúnaíocht a dhéanamh thar graif eolais-imeachta', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Μέτρηση γεγονότων με συλλογισμό πάνω από γραφήματα γεγονότων', 'it': 'NewsReader a SemEval-2018 Task 5: Contare gli eventi ragionando su grafici di conoscenza incentrati sugli eventi', 'kk': 'Жаңалық оқушы 5- тапсырманың half Eval- 2018 тапсырмасында: оқиғаларды есептеп, оқиғаларды оқиға-centric-knowledge-graphs және', 'ka': 'NewsReader at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Counting events by reasoning over event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'hu': 'NewsReader a SemEval-2018-ban 5. feladat: Események számlálása eseményközpontú tudásközpontú grafikonokkal', 'lt': '„NewsReader“ programos „SemEval-2018“ 5 užduotis: įvykių skaičiavimas remiantis renginių centrinių žinių grafikais', 'mt': 'NewsReader at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Counting events by reasoning over event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'mk': 'NewsReader на SemEval-2018 задача 5: Бројување на настаните со размислување за графиките на настаните-центри-знаење', 'ms': 'NewsReader at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Counting events by reasoning over event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 5: Event-centric-knowledge-graphs дээр бодлоор үйл явдлыг тооцоолж', 'pl': 'NewsReader w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 5: Liczenie zdarzeń poprzez rozumowanie na wykresach wydarzeń zorientowanych na zdarzenia', 'no': 'NewsReader at semiEval-2018 Task 5: Tel hendingar ved å rasjona over event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 5-ല്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d: അവസ്ഥ എണ്ണുന്നത് സെന്റ്രിക്ക്- ജ്ഞാന- ഗ്രാഫുകളെക്ക', 'ro': 'NewsReader la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 5: Numărarea evenimentelor prin raționament asupra graficelor de cunoaștere centrate pe evenimente', 'so': 'Shaqada 5: xisaabta dhacdooyinka ku saabsan xaalada-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'si': 'Newsreader at semeval-2018 Job 5: Counting cases by Reasoning over', 'sr': 'Novinarski čitač na zadatku 5: Brojanje događaja razmišljanjem o događajima-centričnim znanjem-graficama', 'ur': 'نیوس ریڈر ٹاکس ۵ میں نیوس ریڈر', 'sv': 'NewsReader på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 5: Räkna händelser genom resonemang över händelsecentrerade kunskapsgrafer', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 5- ல் செய்தியாளர்', 'uz': 'NewsReader at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Counting events by reasoning over event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'vi': 'Người đọc báo tại SemEvl-208 Task 5: tính các sự kiện bằng cách suy luận về các diễn biến trung tâm-kiến thức-biểu đồ', 'nl': 'NewsReader op SemEval-2018 Taak 5: Evenementen tellen door te redeneren over event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'hr': 'Novinarski čitač na zadatku 5: Brojanje događaja razmišljanjem o događajima-centričnim znanjem-graficama', 'da': 'Nyhedslæser på SemEval-2018 Opgave 5: Tælling af begivenheder ved at ræsonnere over begivenhedscentrerede vidensgrafer', 'id': 'NewsReader di SemEval-2018 Tugas 5: Menghitung peristiwa dengan alasan atas peristiwa-sentric-knowledge-graphs', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Преброяване на събитията чрез разсъждения върху графики на събитие-центрове-знание', 'fa': 'نویسی خواننده در کار ۵ در نیمه Eval-۲۰۰۸: حساب اتفاقات با توجه به رویداد-مرکز-دانش-گراف\u200cهای رویداد', 'tr': 'Hatlar okuwçy at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Haýratlary barlap düşünüp otyran event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'de': 'NewsReader auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 5: Zählen von Ereignissen durch Argumentieren über ereignis-zentrierte Wissens-Graphen', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 퀘스트 5: 사건 중심의 지식도를 통해 사건을 추리하여 계산', 'sq': 'NewsReader në SemEval-2018 Task 5: Numërimi i ngjarjeve duke arsyetuar rreth ngjarjeve-qendrore-njohuri-grafikëve', 'sw': 'Msomaji wa Habari katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 5: Kuhesabu matukio kwa kujadili kuhusu picha za maarifa ya kati', 'af': 'Nuusleser by SemEval-2018 Taak 5: Tel gebeurtenis deur redering oor gebeurtenis-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'hy': 'News-read-ը 2018-ի կիսագնդի 5-րդ հանձնարարում. հաշվարկել իրադարձությունները, մտածելով իրադարձությունների-կենտրոնական-գիտելիքի-գրաֆիկների մասին', 'bs': 'Novinarski čitač na zadatku 5: Brojanje događaja razmišljanjem o događajima-centričnim znanjem-graficama', 'az': 'Haqq oxuyucusu at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'bn': 'NewsReader at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Counting events by reasoning over event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'et': 'Uudislugeja SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 5: Sündmuste loendamine üritustele keskenduvate teadmiste graafikute põhjal', 'cs': '횣kol 5: Po훾챠t찼n챠 ud찼lost챠 uva탑ov찼n챠m p힂es ud찼losti orientovan챕 na ud찼losti-znalosti-grafy', 'ca': 'NewsReader at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Counting events by reasoning over event-centric-knowledge-graphs', 'fi': 'NewsReader SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 5: Tapahtumien laskenta tapahtumakeskeisten tietokaavioiden avulla', 'jv': 'New', 'he': 'NewsReader ב SemEval-2018 משימה 5: ספירת אירועים על ידי הגיון על גרפי ידע-מרכז-אירועים', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'sk': 'Novice Bralec na SemEval-2018 Naloga 5: Štetje dogodkov z razmišljanjem preko dogodkov-centričnih-znanj-grafov', 'bo': 'NewsReader at SemEval-2018 Task 5: Counting events by reasoning over event-centric-knowledge-graphs'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe the participation of the NewsReader system in the SemEval-2018 Task 5 on Counting Events and Participants in the Long Tail. NewsReader is a generic unsupervised text processing system that detects events with participants, time and place to generate Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKGs). We minimally adapted these ECKGs to establish a baseline performance for the task. We first use the ECKGs to establish which documents report on the same incident and what event mentions are coreferential. Next, we aggregate ECKGs across coreferential mentions and use the aggregated knowledge to answer the questions of the task. Our participation tests the quality of NewsReader to create ECKGs, as well as the potential of ECKGs to establish event identity and reason over the result to answer the task queries.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف مشاركة نظام NewsReader في SemEval-2018 Task 5 حول عد الأحداث والمشاركين في Long Tail. NewsReader هو نظام معالجة نصوص عام غير خاضع للإشراف يكتشف الأحداث مع المشاركين والوقت والمكان لإنشاء رسوم بيانية معرفية تركز على الأحداث (ECKG). لقد قمنا بتكييف مخططات تخطيط كهربية القلب هذه إلى الحد الأدنى لإنشاء أداء أساسي للمهمة. نستخدم في البداية مخططات تخطيط كهربية القلب (ECKG) لتحديد أي تقرير بالوثائق عن نفس الحادث وما هو الحدث الذي يذكره هو مرجعي. بعد ذلك ، نقوم بتجميع ECKG عبر الإشارات المرجعية واستخدام المعرفة المجمعة للإجابة على أسئلة المهمة. تختبر مشاركتنا جودة NewsReader لإنشاء ECKG ، بالإضافة إلى قدرة ECKG على تحديد هوية الحدث وسبب النتيجة للإجابة على استفسارات المهمة.', 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos la participación del sistema NewsReader en la Tarea 5 de SemEval-2018 sobre el recuento de eventos y participantes en la cola larga. NewsReader es un sistema genérico de procesamiento de textos no supervisado que detecta eventos con los participantes, la hora y el lugar para generar gráficos de conocimiento centrados en eventos (ECKG). Adaptamos mínimamente estos ECKG para establecer un rendimiento de referencia para la tarea. Primero utilizamos los ECKG para establecer qué documentos informan sobre el mismo incidente y qué menciones de eventos son correferenciales. A continuación, agregamos los ECKG en las menciones correferenciales y utilizamos el conocimiento agregado para responder a las preguntas de la tarea. Nuestra participación pone a prueba la calidad de NewsReader para crear ECKG, así como el potencial de los ECKG para establecer la identidad del evento y el motivo sobre el resultado para responder a las consultas de la tarea.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos a participação do sistema NewsReader na Tarefa 5 do SemEval-2018 sobre Contagem de Eventos e Participantes na Cauda Longa. NewsReader é um sistema genérico de processamento de texto não supervisionado que detecta eventos com participantes, hora e local para gerar gráficos de conhecimento centrados em eventos (ECKGs). Adaptamos minimamente esses ECKGs para estabelecer uma linha de base de desempenho para a tarefa. Primeiro, usamos os ECKGs para estabelecer quais documentos relatam o mesmo incidente e quais menções de eventos são correferenciais. Em seguida, agregamos ECKGs em menções co-referenciais e usamos o conhecimento agregado para responder às perguntas da tarefa. Nossa participação testa a qualidade do NewsReader para criar ECKGs, bem como o potencial dos ECKGs para estabelecer a identidade do evento e raciocinar sobre o resultado para responder às consultas da tarefa.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons la participation du système NewsReader à la tâche 5 SEMEVAL-2018 sur le comptage des événements et des participants dans la longue traîne. NewsReader est un système générique de traitement de texte non supervisé qui détecte les événements avec les participants, l'heure et le lieu pour générer des graphes de connaissances centrés sur les événements (ECKG). Nous avons adapté au minimum ces ECKG afin d'établir une performance de base pour la tâche. Nous utilisons d'abord les ECKG pour déterminer quels documents signalent le même incident et quelles mentions d'événements sont coréférentielles. Ensuite, nous agrégeons les ECKG à travers les mentions coréférentielles et utilisons les connaissances agrégées pour répondre aux questions de la tâche. Notre participation teste la qualité de NewsReader pour créer des ECKG, ainsi que le potentiel des ECKG à établir l'identité de l'événement et la raison sur le résultat pour répondre aux requêtes des tâches.", 'ja': '本稿では，ロングテールにおける事象と参加者のカウントに関するSemEval -2018タスク5におけるNewsReaderシステムの参加について述べる。NewsReaderは、参加者、時間、場所を持つイベントを検出してイベント中心のナレッジグラフ（ ECKG ）を生成する、一般的な監視されていないテキスト処理システムです。タスクのベースラインのパフォーマンスを確立するために、これらのECKGを最小限に適応させました。まず、ECKGを使用して、同じインシデントについてどの文書が報告され、どのイベントがコレクショナルであるかを確認します。次に、コレクショナルメンション全体のECKGを集約し、集約された知識を使用してタスクの質問に答えます。当社の参加は、ECKGを作成するためのNewsReaderの品質、ならびにタスククエリに答えるためのイベントアイデンティティと結果に対する理性を確立するECKGの可能性をテストします。', 'zh': '本文,述NewsReader统于SemEval-2018务5中者,5及计长尾参与者。 NewsReader者,通用无监文之统,可检参与者之事,时与地,以生事为心图谱(ECKG)。 此ECKG最卑,以立事基线性也。 先用ECKG定文档告同一事,及言事相关也。 合而 ECKG之,以合对之。 臣等参试NewsReader创ECKG之量,及ECKG立事推理以询其力。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем участие системы NewsReader в задаче 5 SemEval-2018 по подсчету событий и участников в длинном хвосте. NewsReader - это общая неконтролируемая система обработки текста, которая обнаруживает события с участниками, время и место для создания событийно-ориентированных графиков знаний (ЭККГ). Мы минимально адаптировали эти ЭККГ, чтобы установить базовую производительность для этой задачи. Сначала мы используем ЭККГ, чтобы определить, какие документы сообщают об одном и том же инциденте и какие упоминания о событии являются ключевыми. Далее мы агрегируем ЭККГ по основным упоминаниям и используем агрегированные знания для ответа на вопросы задачи. Наше участие проверяет качество NewsReader для создания ЭККГ, а также потенциал ЭККГ для установления идентичности события и причины над результатом, чтобы ответить на запросы задачи.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम लंबी पूंछ में घटनाओं और प्रतिभागियों की गिनती पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 5 में NewsReader प्रणाली की भागीदारी का वर्णन करते हैं। NewsReader एक सामान्य असुरक्षित पाठ प्रसंस्करण प्रणाली है जो प्रतिभागियों, समय और स्थान के साथ घटनाओं का पता लगाती है ताकि इवेंट केंद्रित ज्ञान ग्राफ़ (ECKGs) उत्पन्न किया जा सके। हमने कार्य के लिए एक आधार रेखा प्रदर्शन स्थापित करने के लिए इन ECKGs को कम से कम अनुकूलित किया। हम पहले ECKGs का उपयोग यह स्थापित करने के लिए करते हैं कि एक ही घटना पर कौन से दस्तावेज़ रिपोर्ट करते हैं और जो घटना का उल्लेख करता है, वे सह-संबंधित हैं। इसके बाद, हम सह-संबंधित उल्लेखों में ECKGs को एकत्रित करते हैं और कार्य के प्रश्नों का उत्तर देने के लिए एकत्रित ज्ञान का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारी भागीदारी ECKGs बनाने के लिए NewsReader की गुणवत्ता का परीक्षण करती है, साथ ही साथ कार्य प्रश्नों का उत्तर देने के लिए परिणाम पर घटना पहचान और कारण स्थापित करने के लिए ECKGs की क्षमता भी।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar rannpháirtíocht an chórais NewsReader i dTasc 5 SemEval-2018 ar Imeachtaí Comhaireamh agus Rannpháirtithe sa Long Tail. Is córas próiseála téacs cineálach gan mhaoirseacht é NewsReader a bhraitheann imeachtaí le rannpháirtithe, am agus áit chun Graif Eolais Imeachtaí Lárnach (ECKGanna) a ghiniúint. Rinneamar na ECKGanna seo a oiriúnú ar a laghad chun feidhmíocht bonnlíne a bhunú don tasc. Bainimid úsáid as na ECKGanna ar dtús chun a fháil amach cé na doiciméid a thuairiscíonn ar an teagmhas céanna agus cad iad na hócáidí a luaitear teagmhais ríthábhachtach. Ansin, déanaimid ECKGanna a chomhiomlánú thar lua croí-thorthúil agus úsáidimid an t-eolas comhiomlán chun ceisteanna an taisc a fhreagairt. Déanann ár rannpháirtíocht tástáil ar cháilíocht Léitheoir Nuachta chun ECKGanna a chruthú, chomh maith leis an gcumas atá ag ECKGanna chun céannacht an imeachta a bhunú agus cúis leis an toradh chun ceisteanna an taisc a fhreagairt.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ აღწერეთ სისტემის გარეშე სისტემის დანაწილეობას semiEval-2018 დავალების 5 მოვლენების შესახებ და მოვლენების შესახებ ძალიან დამატებით. ინფორმაციის კონფიგურატორი არის განსხვავებული ტექსტის პროცესისტემა, რომელიც მოვლენების, დროის და ადგილთან განსხვავებს მოვლენების ცენტრიკური ინფორმაციის გრაფიების შექმნა. ჩვენ მინიმალურად ამ ECKG-ების შესაძლებელად დავაკეთეთ სამუშაო მუშაო გამოსახულება. ჩვენ პირველი გამოყენებთ ECKGs-ს, რომელსაც დოკუმენტები იგივე ინტენტიფიკაციის შეტყობინებაში და რომელსაც მოვლენების შეტყობინებაში იგივე მოვლენება შემდეგ, ჩვენ ECKG-ს ყველაფერენციალური ამოცანებით დავყენებთ და აგგრეგურაციული ცნობილების გამოყენებთ, რომ დავუპასუხოთ დავალების კითხვების შესახებ. ჩვენი დაწყვეტილება განახლოების განახლოების გასაკეთებლად ECKGs-ს შექმნა და ECKGs-ის პონციალური გასაკეთებლად მოვლენის იდენტიფიკაციის და მიზეზის გასაკეთებლად გასაკეთებლად.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз жаңалық оқиғаларды есептеу жүйесінің біртінші-2018 тапсырмасының 5- тапсырмасында қатынау жүйесінің қатынауын түсіндіреміз. Оқиға орталық білім графикалары (ECKG) құру үшін оқиғалармен, уақыт мен орындағы оқиғаларды табу үшін жаңалық оқиғалар оқиғалармен байқалмаған мәтін өңдеу жүйесі. Біз бұл ECKG тапсырманың негізгі жолдарды орнату үшін кемінде өзгертдік. Біз біріншіден ECKG құжаттарды бір оқиға туралы қай құжаттарды және оқиға туралы хабарлау үшін қолданамыз. Келесіден, біз ECKG-дерді тапсырманың сұрақтарына жауап беру үшін сұрақтарды қолданамыз. Қатысушылық ECKG жасау үшін NewsReader сапасының, және ECKG құрылғысының оқиға идентификациясын және тапсырмалардың сұрақтарына жауап беру үшін оқиға идентификациясын және себептер', 'it': "In questo articolo descriviamo la partecipazione del sistema NewsReader al SemEval-2018 Task 5 sul conteggio degli eventi e dei partecipanti alla coda lunga. NewsReader è un sistema generico di elaborazione del testo non supervisionato che rileva eventi con i partecipanti, tempo e luogo per generare Event Centric Knowledge Graph (ECKG). Abbiamo adattato minimamente questi ECKG per stabilire una performance di base per l'attività. In primo luogo utilizziamo i ECKG per stabilire quali documenti riportano sullo stesso incidente e quali eventi menzionati sono correferenziali. Successivamente, aggregamo ECKG attraverso menzioni coreferenziali e utilizziamo le conoscenze aggregate per rispondere alle domande del compito. La nostra partecipazione verifica la qualità di NewsReader per creare ECKG, così come il potenziale degli ECKG per stabilire l'identità e la ragione dell'evento sul risultato per rispondere alle domande di task.", 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία περιγράφουμε τη συμμετοχή του συστήματος στην εργασία 5 για την καταμέτρηση γεγονότων και συμμετεχόντων στην Μακριά ουρά. Το NewsReader είναι ένα γενικό σύστημα επεξεργασίας κειμένου χωρίς επίβλεψη που ανιχνεύει συμβάντα με συμμετέχοντες, χρόνο και τόπο για τη δημιουργία Γραφείων Γνώσης Κεντρικών Εκδηλώσεων (ECKG). Προσαρμόστε ελάχιστα αυτά τα ΗΚΚ για να καθορίσουμε μια βασική απόδοση για το έργο. Χρησιμοποιούμε πρώτα τα ΕΚΚΠ για να καθορίσουμε ποια έγγραφα αναφέρουν το ίδιο περιστατικό και ποια γεγονότα αναφέρονται σε σχέση με τα γεγονότα. Στη συνέχεια, συγκεντρώνουμε τα ΕΚΚΚ σε συνάφειες αναφορές και χρησιμοποιούμε τη συγκεντρωτική γνώση για να απαντήσουμε στα ερωτήματα του έργου. Η συμμετοχή μας δοκιμάζει την ποιότητα του για τη δημιουργία ECKG, καθώς και τη δυνατότητα των ECKG να καθιερώσουν ταυτότητα γεγονότος και λόγο για το αποτέλεσμα για να απαντήσουν στα ερωτήματα εργασίας.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname naujienų skaitytojų sistemos dalyvavimą 2018 m. pusmečio vertinimo 5 užduotyje dėl skaičiavimo įvykių ir dalyvių ilgame lauke. NewsReader is a generic unsupervised text processing system that detects events with participants, time and place to generate Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKGs).  Mes minimaliai pritaikėme šias EKG, kad nustatytume pagrindinį užduoties rezultatą. Pirmiausia naudojame ECKG, kad nustatytume, kokie dokumentai praneša apie tą patį incident ą ir kokie įvykiai minimi yra nuoseklūs. Kita vertus, mes sujungiame EKGs į vientisus žodžius ir naudojame suvestines žinias atsakydami į užduoties klausimus. Mūsų dalyvavimas išbando NewsReader kokybę kurti ECKG, taip pat ECKG potencialą nustatyti įvykio tapatybę ir priežastį dėl rezultato atsakyti į užduočių klausimus.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a NewsReader rendszer részvételét a SemEval-2018 Task 5 "Események számlálása és résztvevők a hosszú farokban" című eseményekben. A NewsReader egy általános, felügyelet nélküli szövegfeldolgozó rendszer, amely felismeri a résztvevők eseményeit, időpontját és helyét az Eseményközpontú Tudásgráfok (ECKG-k) generálására. Minimálisan adaptáltuk ezeket az ECKG-ket, hogy megállapítsuk a feladat alapvető teljesítményét. Először az ECKG-ket használjuk annak megállapítására, hogy mely dokumentumok jelentenek ugyanarról az eseményről és mely eseményekről szóló említésekről van szó. Ezt követően összesítjük az ECKG-ket a coreferenciális említésekre, és az összesített tudást felhasználjuk a feladat kérdéseire. Részvételünk teszteli az ECKG-k létrehozásához szükséges NewsReader minőségét, valamint az ECKG-k lehetőségét arra, hogy megállapítsák az esemény identitását és érvelését a feladatkérdések megválaszolásához.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, го опишуваме учеството на системот за читање вести во полуевал-2018 задачата 5 за броење настани и учесници во долготрајниот резултат. NewsReader е генеричен ненадгледуван систем за процес на текст кој детектира настани со учесници, време и место за генерирање на централни знања на настаните (ECKG). Ние минимално ги адаптиравме овие ЕККГ за да воспоставиме основна резултат за задачата. Прво ги користиме ЕККГ за да утврдиме кои документи известуваат за истиот инцидент и кои настани споменуваат се кореферентни. Next, we aggregate ECKGs across coreferential mentions and use the aggregated knowledge to answer the questions of the task.  Нашето учество го тестира квалитетот на NewsReader за создавање ЕККГ, како и потенцијалот на ЕКГ за воспоставување идентитет на настаните и разумот во врска со резултатот за одговор на прашањата за задачите.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan ketertarikan sistem pembaca berita dalam SemEval-2018 Tugas 5 tentang Kiraan Peristiwa dan Peserta dalam Long Tail. NewsReader adalah sistem pemprosesan teks yang tidak diawasi yang generik yang mengesan peristiwa dengan peserta, masa dan tempat untuk menghasilkan Graf Pengetahuan Tengah Peristiwa (ECKG). Kami sedikit menyesuaikan ECKG ini untuk menetapkan prestasi dasar untuk tugas. Kami pertama-tama menggunakan ECKG untuk menetapkan dokumen mana laporan tentang insiden yang sama dan apa peristiwa yang disebut adalah coreferential. Next, we aggregate ECKGs across coreferential mentions and use the aggregated knowledge to answer the questions of the task.  Pesertaan kami menguji kualiti NewsReader untuk mencipta ECKG, serta potensi ECKG untuk menetapkan identiti peristiwa dan alasan atas keputusan untuk menjawab pertanyaan tugas.', 'ml': 'In this paper, we describe the participation of the NewsReader system in the SemEval-2018 Task 5 on Counting Events and Participants in the Long Tail.  വാര്\u200dത്ത വായിക്കുകാരന്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത പങ്കുകാരുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d, സമയവും സ്ഥലം നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപ ഈ ജോലിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ചെറുതായി ഈ എക്കെഗികള നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം യെക്കെജികളെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഒരേ സംഭവം കുറിച്ചുള്ള രേഖകള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടിയാണ്. എന്ത് സംഭവിച പിന്നീട്, നമ്മള്\u200d എക്കെഗികളെ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dററിയല്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപനങ്ങളിലൂടെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുകയും, ജോലിയുടെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക ഞങ്ങളുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നത് എക്സികെജികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാനുള്ള വാര്\u200dത്താവിന്റെ ഗുണവും പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ജോലി ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, aħna niddeskrivu l-parteċipazzjoni tas-sistema NewsReader fis-SemEval-2018 Task 5 dwar l-Għadd ta’ Avvenimenti u Parteċipanti fit-Tul. NewsReader hija sistema ġenerika ta’ pproċessar tat-test mhux sorveljata li tidentifika avvenimenti mal-parteċipanti, iż-żmien u l-post biex tiġġenera Grafiki ta’ Għarfien Ċentrali tal-Avvenimenti (ECKGs). We minimally adapted these ECKGs to establish a baseline performance for the task.  L-ewwel aħna nużaw l-ECKGs biex nistabbilixxu liema dokumenti jirrapportaw dwar l-istess inċident u liema avvenimenti jsemmu huma koreferenti. Imbagħad, aħna nġabru flimkien l-ECKGs f’semmiet koreferenti u nużaw l-għarfien aggregat biex iwieġbu għall-mistoqsijiet tal-kompitu. Il-parteċipazzjoni tagħna tittestja l-kwalità tal-NewsReader biex jinħolqu ECKGs, kif ukoll il-potenzjal tal-ECKGs biex jistabbilixxu l-identità tal-avveniment u r-raġuni dwar ir-riżultat biex iwieġbu għall-mistoqsijiet dwar il-kompitu.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Хурт Холбооны Холбооны Нью-Холбооны системийн оролцоог SemEval-2018-ийн 5 даалгаварын талаар тооцоолж байна. Хэдийгээр оролцогчдыг, цаг болон газартай холбоотой үйл явдал үүсгэх төв мэдлэг график (ECKGs) боловсруулахын тулд шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэрээр хангалтгүй текст процесс систем юм. Бид эдгээр ECKG-г ажил дээр суурь шугам үйлдвэрлэлийг зохион байгуулахын тулд бага зэрэг зохион байгуулсан. Эхлээд бид ECKG-г хэрхэн баримтууд яг ижил үйл явдлын тухай мэдээллийг гаргаж, ямар үйл явдлын тухай ярьдаг талаар ашиглаж байна. Дараагийн дараа бид ECKG-г цуглуулж ажлын асуултад хариулт өгөхийн тулд цуглуулсан мэдлэг хэрэглэдэг. Харин бидний оролцоо оролцоо нь ECKG-г бүтээх NewsReader-ын сайн чанарыг шалгаж, болон ECKG-ын зорилго нь үйл явдлын тодорхойлолт, шалтгаан нь ажлын асуултын хариулт өгөх боломжтой.', 'no': 'I denne papiren beskriver vi deltakaren av NewsReader-systemet i semiEval-2018 oppgåva 5 om teljingar av hendingar og deltakarar i lange hald. NewsReader er eit generelt ikkje-oppretta tekstbehandlingssystem som oppdagar hendingar med deltakarar, tid og plass for å laga hendingsgrafar (ECKG). Vi tilpassa desse ECKG-ane for å oppretta ein grunnlinje for oppgåva. Vi bruker først ECKG-ane for å setja opp kva dokument som rapporterer om det samme hendinga og kva hendinga menyar er koreferensielt. Neste samlingar vi ECKG gjennom koreferensielle menytingar og bruk samlinga kunnskap for å svara på spørsmålene på oppgåva. Deltakeringa vårt tester kvaliteten til NewsReader for å laga ECKG, og potensialen til ECKG for å oppretta hendingssidentet og grunn over resultatet for å svara på oppgåvespørringane.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි විස්තර කරනවා අවස්ථාවක් සහ අංශාවක් ලොකු ටේල් වල සේම්වේල්-2018 වැඩේ පද්ධතියේ නියුස්ක්\u200dරීඩ් පද්ධතියේ  Newsreader තමයි සාමාන්\u200dය නොපුරුද්ධික පාළුව පද්ධතියක් හොයාගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය, වෙලාව සහ ස්ථානයක් සමඟ අවස්ථාවක් හොයාගන්න සැකස අපි අඩුවෙන්ම මේ ECKGs වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් මූලික ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ස්ථාපනය කරන්න. අපි මුලින්ම ECKGs පාවිච්චි කරනවා එකම අවස්ථාවයේ කවුද ලිපින්තුවක් වාර්තා කරන්න හා මොන අවස්ථාවක් කියන් ඊලඟට, අපි ECKGs එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කරනවා සහ සම්බන්ධ දන්නම් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්න වලට උත්තර දෙන්න. අපේ සම්බන්ධතාව පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ Newsreader ගැන ECKGs නිර්මාණය කරන්න, සහ ECKGs ගැන සම්බන්ධතාව සඳහා අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa qayb ka qeybqaadashada nidaamka akhriska ee SemEval-2018 shaqo 5 oo ku saabsan xisaabinta dhacdooyinka iyo ka qayb-qaadayaasha dalabka dheer. Qoraalka akhriska waa nidaamka macluumaadka la xiriira qoraalka oo geneeral aan la ilaalinayn, kaas oo soo ogaada dhacdooyinka wadajirka ah, waqti iyo meelo lagu sameeyo fasaxa aqoonta dhexe (ECKGs). Waxaan si ugu yaraan u bedeshay ECKGs-kaas si aan u sameyno sameynta sameynta sameynta shabakadda. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu u isticmaalnaa ECKGs si aan u xaqiijinno dukumentiyada wargelinta isla dhacdadaas iyo xubnaha dhacdooyinka. Dabadeedna waxaan ECKGs ku soo bandhignaa macluumaad la xiriira, waxaynu isticmaalnaa aqoonta la kordhiyey si aan uga jawaabno su'aalaha shaqada. qeybqaadashadayada waxaa imtixaamaya tusaale ahaan waxyaabaha akhriska ee akhriska u sameeya ECKGs iyo awoodda ECKGs in ay sameeyaan aqoonsiga dhacdooyinka iyo sababta ay ugu jawaabaan su'aalaha shaqada.", 'pl': 'W artykule opisano udział systemu NewsReader w zadaniu SemEval-2018 5 dotyczącym liczenia zdarzeń i uczestników długiego ogona. NewsReader to ogólny system przetwarzania tekstu bez nadzoru, który wykrywa zdarzenia z uczestnikami, czas i miejsce do generowania wykresów wiedzy o wydarzeniach (EKKG). W minimalnym stopniu dostosowaliśmy te EKKG, aby ustalić wyniki podstawowe dla tego zadania. W pierwszej kolejności wykorzystujemy EKKG, aby ustalić, które dokumenty raportują o tym samym incydencie i jakie wydarzenia są współodniejsze. Następnie gromadzimy EKKG na współodniejsze wzmianki i wykorzystujemy zagregowaną wiedzę do odpowiedzi na pytania związane z zadaniem. Nasz udział testuje jakość NewsReader do tworzenia EKKG, a także potencjał EKKG do ustalenia tożsamości zdarzeń i uzasadnienia wyniku do odpowiedzi na zadania.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem participarea sistemului NewsReader la Sarcina SemEval-2018 5 privind numărarea evenimentelor și participanților la coada lungă. NewsReader este un sistem generic de procesare a textului nesupravegheat care detectează evenimentele cu participanții, timpul și locul pentru a genera Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKG). Am adaptat minim aceste ECKG-uri pentru a stabili o performanță de bază pentru sarcină. Folosim mai întâi ECKG-urile pentru a stabili ce documente raportează despre același incident și ce evenimente menționează sunt coreferenziale. Apoi, agregăm ECKG-urile prin mențiuni coreferenziale și folosim cunoștințele agregate pentru a răspunde la întrebările sarcinii. Participarea noastră testează calitatea NewsReader pentru crearea ECKG-urilor, precum și potențialul ECKG-urilor de a stabili identitatea evenimentului și raționamentul asupra rezultatului pentru a răspunde la întrebările de sarcină.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sudjelovanje sistema NewsReadera u zadatku 5 za pola Evala-2018 o brojanju događaja i učesnika dugog repa. Novinarski čitač je generičan neodređeni sistem obrade teksta koji otkriva događaje sa sudionicima, vremenom i mestom za stvaranje grafa za znanje događaja u centru događaja (ECKGs). Mi smo se minimalno prilagodili ovim ECKG-ima da bi uspostavili osnovnu funkciju za zadatak. Prvo koristimo ECKG-e kako bi utvrdili koji dokumenti prijavljuju o istom incidentu i koji je događaj spomenuo korisno. Sledeće, skupljamo ECKG preko koreferencijskih spomena i koristimo skupljeno znanje da bi odgovorili na pitanja zadatka. Naša sudjelovanje testira kvalitet NewsReadera za stvaranje ECKG-a, kao i potencijal ECKG-a za uspostavljanje identiteta događaja i razloga za rezultat odgovora na pitanja zadataka.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi NewsReader-systemets deltagande i SemEval-2018 Task 5 om räkning av händelser och deltagare i långsvansen. NewsReader är ett generiskt icke övervakat textbehandlingssystem som detekterar händelser med deltagare, tid och plats för att generera Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKG). Vi anpassade minimalt dessa EKKG för att fastställa en basnivå för uppgiften. Vi använder oss först av ECKG-grupperna för att fastställa vilka dokument som rapporterar om samma incident och vilka händelser som nämns som är sammanhängande. Därefter aggregerar vi ECKG över coreferenzialomnämnanden och använder den aggregerade kunskapen för att besvara uppgiftens frågor. Vårt deltagande testar kvaliteten på NewsReader för att skapa ECKG:er, samt potentialen hos ECKG:er för att fastställa händelseidentitet och resonemang över resultatet för att besvara uppgiftsfrågorna.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் செம்Eval-2018 செய்தி படிப்பாளர் அமைப்பின் பகிர்ந்ததை விவரிக்கிறோம் நீண்ட ட டேயில் உள்ள செய்தி வாசிகள் மற்று @ info: whatsthis நாங்கள் செயல்க்கான அடிப்படைக்கோடு செயல்பாட்டை உருவாக்க இந்த ECKGகளை குறைந்தபட்ச மாற்றியது. நாம் முதலில் ECKGகளை பயன்படுத்தி எந்த ஆவணங்கள் அதே நிகழ்வு பற்றிய அறிக்கையை கண்டுபிடி அடுத்து, Our participation tests the quality of NewsReader to create ECKGs, as well as the potential of ECKGs to establish event identity and reason over the result to answer the task queries.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے نیوز ریڈر سیسٹم کی مشارکت کی نسبت نیویل-2018 ٹاکس ۵ کی ٹاکس کی نسبت لانگ ٹیل میں حاصل کرنے اور مشارکت کرنے والوں کے بارے میں بیان کی ہے. نیوسرڈر ایک عمومی غیر قابل تحقیق کیے جانے والی ٹیکسٹ پرسس سیسٹم ہے جو حضار کرنے والوں، وقت اور جگہ کے ساتھ اتفاقات کو پہچان سکتا ہے۔ ہم نے ان ECKGs کو عملہ کے لئے بنسطلین کی عملہ بنانے کے لئے کم اندازہ دکھایا۔ ہم پہلی بار ECKGs کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کس دکھانے کے بارے میں ایک ہی حادثہ کے بارے میں راپورت کرتے ہیں اور کس حادثہ کا ذکر کرتا ہے اچھا ہے۔ اس کے بعد ہم ECKGs کو مہربانی کے ذکر میں جمع کرتے ہیں اور اس کے سوال جواب دینے کے لئے جمع علم کا استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے حضور نیوسرڈر کی کیفیت کا امتحان ہے ECKGs بنانے کے لئے، اور ECKGs کی امکانات بھی ہے کہ ایڈینٹ شناسیت اور نتیجہ کے ذریعے کام سوالیوں کی جواب دینے کے لئے اجرا کریں.', 'vi': 'Trong tờ báo này, chúng tôi mô tả sự tham gia của hệ thống Newtường trong nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 về Sự kiện Đếm và Những người tham gia Đuôi Long. "News Reade" là một hệ thống văn bản không giám sát chung để tìm thấy sự kiện với những người tham gia, thời gian và địa điểm để tạo ra đồ hoạ về tri thức trung tâm sự kiện. Chúng tôi đã thích nghi tối thiểu những ECKG để thiết lập một hiệu suất cơ bản cho nhiệm vụ. Trước hết, chúng tôi dùng các ECKG để xác định các tài liệu báo cáo về cùng một sự cố và những gì đề cập là nhượng bộ. Tiếp theo, chúng tôi tập hợp các ECKG trong các đề cập nhượng bộ và sử dụng các kiến thức tập hợp để trả lời các câu hỏi của nhiệm vụ. Sự tham gia của chúng tôi kiểm tra chất lượng của tờ NewReader để tạo ra ECKG, cũng như khả năng của ECKG để xác định danh tính sự kiện và lí lẽ về kết quả để trả lời các yêu cầu nhiệm vụ.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz SemEval-2018 xizmatdagi Newsreader tizimning qismlarini o'rganishni anglatamiz. Long Tail ichidagi hodisalar va qismlarni hisoblash uchun 5 vazifani anglatamiz. Comment Biz vazifa uchun asosiy bajarish bajarishni yaratish uchun oddiy ECKG'larni yaratdik. Biz birinchi ECKG'lardan foydalanamiz, bitta hodisa haqida qoʻllanmalar haqida xabar beruvchi va hodisa qanday muhimi hisoblanadi. Keyingi, biz ECKG'larni birlashtiramiz va vazifaning savollariga javob berish uchun ko'proq bilimni ishlatamiz. @ info: whatsthis", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме участието на системата за четене на вестници в задача 5 за преброяване на събитията и участниците в дългата опашка. НюзРийдър е обща система за обработка на текстове, която открива събития с участници, време и място за генериране на Графика на Знанието Центрово Събитие (ЕККГ). Ние минимално адаптирахме тези ЕККГ, за да установим базова ефективност за задачата. Първо използваме ЕККГ, за да установим кои документи докладват за един и същ инцидент и кои събития споменавания са съпроводени. След това обобщаваме ЕККГ между съперни споменания и използваме обобщените знания, за да отговорим на въпросите на задачата. Участието ни тества качеството на НюзРийдър за създаване на ЕККГ, както и потенциала на ЕККГ да установят идентичност на събитието и разум върху резултата, за да отговорят на зададените запитвания.', 'da': "I denne artikel beskriver vi NewsReader-systemets deltagelse i SemEval-2018 Opgave 5 om tælling af begivenheder og deltagere i langhalen. NewsReader er et generisk uautoriseret tekstbehandlingssystem, der registrerer begivenheder med deltagere, tid og sted for at generere Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKG'er). Vi har minimalt tilpasset disse EKKG'er til at fastlægge en baseline performance for opgaven. Vi bruger først ECKG'erne til at fastslå, hvilke dokumenter der rapporterer om den samme hændelse, og hvilke hændelsesnævnelser der er relevante. Dernæst samler vi ECKG'er på tværs af kerneferential omtaler og bruger den samlede viden til at besvare opgavens spørgsmål. Vores deltagelse tester kvaliteten af NewsReader til at oprette ECKG'er, samt potentialet af ECKG'er til at etablere begivenhedens identitet og begrundelse over resultatet for at besvare opgaveforsøgningerne.", 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sudjelovanje sustava NewsReadera u zadatku 5 za pola Eval-2018 o brojanju događaja i učesnika dugog repa. Novinarski čitač je generični neodređeni sustav obrade teksta koji otkriva događaje s učesnicima, vremenom i mjestom za stvaranje grafika znanja Centralnih događaja (ECKG). Mi smo se minimalno prilagodili ovim ECKG-ima kako bi uspostavili početnu funkciju zadatka. Prvo koristimo ECKG-e kako bi utvrdili koje dokumente prijave o istim incidentima i koje su podsjećanje događaja korisne. Sljedeće, skupljamo ECKG-e preko korisnih spomena i koristimo skupljeno znanje kako bi odgovorili na pitanja zadatka. Naša sudjelovanje testira kvalitet NewsReadera kako bi stvorila ECKG-e, kao i potencijal ECKG-a za utvrđivanje identiteta događaja i razloga zbog rezultata odgovora na pitanja zadataka.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir die Beteiligung des NewsReader-Systems an der SemEval-2018 Task 5 zum Zählen von Ereignissen und Teilnehmern im Long Tail. NewsReader ist ein generisches unüberwachtes Textverarbeitungssystem, das Ereignisse mit Teilnehmern, Zeit und Ort erkennt, um Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (EKKGs) zu generieren. Wir haben diese EKKGs minimal angepasst, um eine Basisleistung für die Aufgabe zu etablieren. Anhand der EKKGs ermitteln wir zunächst, welche Dokumente über denselben Vorfall berichten und welche Ereigniserwähnungen kernrelevant sind. Als nächstes aggregieren wir EKKGs über coreferenzielle Erwähnungen und nutzen das aggregierte Wissen, um die Fragen der Aufgabe zu beantworten. Unsere Teilnahme testet die Qualität von NewsReader, um EKKGs zu erstellen, sowie das Potenzial von EKKGs, Ereignisidentität und Vernunft über das Ergebnis zu etablieren, um die Aufgabenfragen zu beantworten.', 'id': 'Dalam koran ini, kami menggambarkan participasi sistem pembaca berita di SemEval-2018 Task 5 tentang menghitung peristiwa dan peserta di Long Tail. NewsReader is a generic unsupervised text processing system that detects events with participants, time and place to generate Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKGs).  Kami minimal mengadaptasi ECKG ini untuk menetapkan prestasi dasar untuk tugas. Kami pertama-tama menggunakan ECKG untuk menentukan dokumen mana laporan tentang insiden yang sama dan apa peristiwa yang disebutkan adalah coreferential. Selanjutnya, kita menggabungkan ECKG melalui sebutan yang sama dan menggunakan pengetahuan yang sama untuk menjawab pertanyaan tugas. Partesipasi kami menguji kualitas NewsReader untuk menciptakan ECKG, serta potensi ECKG untuk menetapkan identitas peristiwa dan alasan atas hasil untuk menjawab pertanyaan tugas.', 'nl': "In dit artikel beschrijven we de deelname van het NewsReader systeem aan de SemEval-2018 Taak 5 over het tellen van gebeurtenissen en deelnemers in de Long Tail. NewsReader is een generiek tekstverwerkingssysteem zonder toezicht dat gebeurtenissen detecteert met deelnemers, tijd en plaats om Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKG's) te genereren. We hebben deze ECKG's minimaal aangepast om een basisprestatie voor de taak vast te stellen. We gebruiken eerst de ECKG's om vast te stellen welke documenten over hetzelfde incident rapporteren en welke gebeurtenisvermeldingen kernrelevant zijn. Vervolgens aggregeren we ECKG's over coreferentiële vermeldingen en gebruiken we de geaggregeerde kennis om de vragen van de taak te beantwoorden. Onze deelname test de kwaliteit van NewsReader om ECKG's te maken, evenals het potentieel van ECKG's om gebeurtenisidentiteit en redelijkheid over het resultaat vast te stellen om de taakvragen te beantwoorden.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea ushiriki wa mfumo wa Wasomaji katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 kuhusu kuhesabu matukio na washiriki katika Taifa ndefu. Msomaji wa Habari ni mfumo wa utaratibu wa ujumbe usio na uhakika unaotambua matukio na washiriki, muda na sehemu ya kutengeneza Grafika ya Ujuzi wa Kituo (ECKGs). Hata kidogo tulibadilisha ECKG hizi kwa ajili ya kuanzisha utendaji wa msingi wa kazi hiyo. Kwa mara ya kwanza tunatumia mashirika ya ECKG ili kuthibitisha nyaraka zipi zinazoripoti kuhusu tukio hilo na jinsi ambacho kitambulisho cha tukio hilo ni muhimu. Next, we aggregate ECKGs across coreferential mentions and use the aggregated knowledge to answer the questions of the task.  Ushiriki wetu unajaribu kiwango cha wasomaji wa habari cha kutengeneza ECKGs, pamoja na uwezekano wa ECKGs wa kuanzisha utambulisho wa tukio na sababu juu ya matokeo ya kujibu maswali ya kazi.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 뉴스 리더 시스템이SemEval-18 퀘스트 5에 참여한 상황을 묘사했고 퀘스트 5는 통계 사건과 긴 꼬리 참여자와 관련된다.NewsReader는 참여자, 시간, 장소의 이벤트를 감지하고 이벤트 중심의 지식 그래프(ECKG)를 생성하는 일반적인 무감독 텍스트 처리 시스템이다.이러한 ECKG는 작업의 베이스라인 성능을 설정하기 위해 최소한의 조정을 수행했습니다.먼저 ECKG를 사용하여 동일한 이벤트가 보고된 파일과 상호 연관된 이벤트가 언급된 파일을 결정합니다.다음 단계에서는 ECKG에 대한 언급과 함께 요약된 지식을 사용하여 임무에 대한 질문에 대답합니다.ECKG를 만드는 뉴스 리더의 질과 ECKG가 이벤트 신분을 구축하고 결과를 추리하여 임무 조회에 대답할 수 있는 잠재력을 테스트하는 데 참여했습니다.', 'sq': "In this paper, we describe the participation of the NewsReader system in the SemEval-2018 Task 5 on Counting Events and Participants in the Long Tail.  NewsReader është një sistem i përgjithshëm i përdorimit të tekstit pa mbikqyrje që zbulon ngjarje me pjesëmarrës, kohë dhe vend për të gjeneruar grafikë të njohurive qendrore të ngjarjeve (ECKGs). Ne minimalisht i përshtatëm këto ECKG për të krijuar një rezultat bazë për detyrën. Ne së pari përdorim ECKG-të për të vendosur se cilat dokumente raportojnë për të njëjtin incident dhe çfarë ngjarje përmend janë koreferente. Pastaj, ne bashkojmë ECKG-të nëpërmjet përmendimeve koreferenciale dhe përdorim njohuritë e bashkuara për të përgjigjur pyetjeve të detyrës. Pjesëmarrja jonë teston cilësinë e NewsReader për të krijuar ECKG si dhe potencialin e ECKG për të vendosur identitetin e ngjarjes dhe arsyen lidhur me rezultatin për t'u përgjigjur pyetjeve të detyrës.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مشارکت سیستم خواننده خبری را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که در ماموریت نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ در مورد شمارش اتفاقات و شرکتگران در تاریخ طولانی است. خبر Reader یک سیستم پردازش متن غیرقابل تحویل است که رویدادها را با شرکتگران، زمان و جایی برای تولید گرافهای دانش مرکزی رویداد (ECKGs) شناسایی می\u200cکند. ما حداقل این ECKG ها را برای ایجاد یک عملکرد خط پایین برای این کار تغییر دادیم. اولین بار از ECKG استفاده می کنیم تا تشخیص دهیم کدام مدارک در مورد یک حادثه گزارش داده می شود و چه اتفاقی که در مورد این حادثه اشاره می کنند قابل تعریف است. بعدش، ما ECKGs را در مقابل اشاره\u200cهای مربوط به جمع می\u200cکنیم و از دانش جمع استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا سوالات این کار را پاسخ دهیم. مشارکت ما کیفیت NewsReader را آزمایش می\u200cکند تا ECKGs را ایجاد کند، و پتانسیل ECKGs برای ایجاد هویت رویداد و دلیل روی نتیجه پاسخ پرسش رویداد.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք նորությունների կարդացողների համակարգի մասնակցությունը 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի 5-ի հանձնարարում, որը վերաբերում է երկար փուլում հաշվարկվող իրադարձություններին և մասնակիցներին: Newsread-ը ընդհանուր անվերահսկված տեքստի վերամշակումների համակարգ է, որը հայտնաբերում է իրադարձությունները մասնակիցների հետ, ժամանակի և տեղի միջոցով, որպեսզի ստեղծվի իրադարձությունների կենտրոնական գիտելիքի գրաֆներ (EԿԳ). We minimally adapted these ECKGs to establish a baseline performance for the task.  Սկզբում մենք օգտագործում ենք ԷԿԿԳ-ները, որպեսզի հաստատենք, թե ինչ փաստաթղթեր են գրում նույն իրադարձությունների մասին, և թե ինչ իրադարձություններ են նշում համապատասխանաբար: Հաջորդ, մենք համախմբում ենք էկԿԳ-ները կորեֆերենցիալ հիշողությունների միջով և օգտագործում ենք համախմբված գիտելիքները, որպեսզի պատասխանենք խնդրի հարցերին: Մեր մասնակցությունը ստուգում է Newsread-ի որակը, որպեսզի ստեղծենք էկԿԳ, ինչպես նաև էկԿԳ-ների պոտենցիալը, որպեսզի հաստատենք իրադարձությունների ինքնությունը և պատճառը, որպեսզի պատասխանեն խնդրի հարցերին:', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, biz Haýzo Reader sisteminiň SemEval-2018 Taýýasy 5-nji Görevi barada roli hasaplaýrys. Hatlar okuwçy, Haýsy Merkezi Bilim Grafleri (ECKGs) bilen okamak üçin nusgalary tanap edilen jeneral gaýd edilmedik metin işleýän sistemdir. Biz bu ECKG'leriň iň azyndan çykyşlygyny bu işiň üçin esasy çykyşlygyny bejermek üçin üýtgetdik. Ilkinji gezek ECKG'lary bir ýagdaýda hasaplanyşyň bardygyny we olaryň nähili hasaplanyşyny barlamak üçin ullanýarys. Soňraki, ECKG-lary gorkunç agzalaryň bardygyny we bu işiň soraglaryna jogap bermek üçin toplanýan bilimi ulanýarys. Biziň chikanchasymyz Haýsy Okuwçysynyň kalitesini ECKG'lary bejermek üçin, we bellenen soraglaryň üstüne jogap bermek üçin bolup geçýän zadyň kimligini we sebäbini barlamak üçin synanyşýar.", 'az': "Bu kağıtda, biz Nişanlar Reader sisteminin paylaşışılığını Özünün Özünün Özünün Özünün-2018 Özünün 5. Görevi haqqında hesablama və Uzun İşkilərin Haqq-hesablaması barəsində təsdiqləyirik. Haqq Okuyucu, iştirakçiləri, vaxtı və yeri olaraq olaraq orta bilgi Grafikləri (ECKG) yaratmaq üçün istifadə edilməmiş mətn işləməsi sistemidir. Biz bu ECKG-ləri bu işin əsas sətir performansını qurmaq üçün ən az uyğunlaşdırdıq. Biz ilk dəfə ECKG'ləri istifadə edirik ki, hansı məsələlər istifadə edir və hansı məsələlər istifadə edir. Sonra, ECKG-ləri mərhəmətli danışmalar arasında toplayırıq və işlərin sorularına cavab vermək üçün toplanmış elmi istifadə edirik. Xəlvətimiz ECKG yaratmaq üçün NewsReader qismətini və ECKG'lərin vəsiyyətini təyin etmək üçün istifadə etmək üçün istifadə etmək üçün istifadə edir.", 'af': "In hierdie papier, beskrywe ons die deelnadering van die Nuusleeser stelsel in die semiEval-2018 taak 5 oor tel gebeurtenis en deelnaders in die Lang Tail. Nuusleser is 'n algemene ongeonderwerpende teks verwerking stelsel wat verkry gebeurtenis met deelnaders, tyd en plek na genereer gebeurtenis sentreel kennis grafieke (ECKGs). Ons het hierdie ECKG minimaal aanpas om 'n basisline prestasie vir die taak te stel. Ons gebruik eerste die ECKG om te stel wat dokumente raporteer op dieselfde incidente en wat gebeurtenis bepaal is koreferensieal. Volgende, ons bymekaar ECKGs oor koreferensiele bepaalde en gebruik die agtergroot kennis om die vrae van die taak te antwoord. Ons deelnadering toets die kwaliteit van NuusLeser om ECKGs te skep, as ook die potensiele van ECKGs om gebeurtenis identiteit en rede te stel oor die resultaat om die taak vrae te antwoord.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የዜና አናባቢው ስርዓት በSemEval-2018 ስራ 5 ላይ በረጅም ታይል ውስጥ ጉዳዮች እና ተጋሪዎች ላይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የዜና አናባቢው የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ ስርዓት ነው፤ ሁኔታ፣ ሰዓት እና ስፍራን ለመፍጠር የሚታወቅ ጉዳዮች (ECKGs) ነው። ለስራው የመጀመሪያ ደረጃዎችን ለማግኘት እነዚህን ECKGን አቀናጠልን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የECKGs ሰነዶች በአንድ ጉዳይ ላይ ማንኛውን ሰነድ እና የትኛውን ጉዳይ ማሰራበት እና ምን ተቃውሞ እንደሆነ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በኋላውም የECKGን አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን እናስጠጋለን የስራ ጥያቄዎችን ለመመልስ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ተግባራችን ECKGs ለመፍጠር የዜና አዳባቢ ጥያቄን ይፈትናል፤ እናም የስራ ጠያቂዎችን ለመመልስ የግንኙነት identity እና ምክንያት ለመፍጠር የECKGs ግንኙነት ማግኘት እና ማስቻል ነው፡፡', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme účast systému NewsReader na úkolu SemEval-2018 5 na počítání událostí a účastníků v Long Tailu. NewsReader je obecný systém zpracování textu bez dohledu, který detekuje události s účastníky, čas a místo pro generování Event Centric Knowledge Graph (EKKG). Tyto EKKG jsme minimálně upravili, abychom stanovili základní výkon pro tento úkol. Nejprve používáme EKKG k určení, které dokumenty hlásí o stejném incidentu a které zmínky o událostech jsou společné. Dále agregováme EKKG napříč společnými zmínkami a využíváme agregované znalosti k odpovědi na otázky úkolu. Naše účast testuje kvalitu NewsReader pro vytváření EKKG, stejně jako potenciál EKKG vytvořit identitu události a důvod k odpovědi na dotazy úkolů.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৮-এর সংবাদ পাঠক সিস্টেমের অংশগ্রহণের বিষয়টি বর্ণনা করি দীর্ঘ টেইলের অনুষ্ঠান এবং অংশগ্রহণকারীদের ক নিউজ পাঠক একটি সাধারণ সংরক্ষিত টেক্সট প্রক্রিয়ার সিস্টেম যা অংশগ্রহণকারীদের সাথে সময় এবং স্থানের ঘটনা সনাক্ত করে যাচ্ছে কেন্দ্রিক জ্ঞান We minimally adapted these ECKGs to establish a baseline performance for the task.  আমরা প্রথম ইকেজিগুলো ব্যবহার করি একই ঘটনায় কোন নথিপত্র প্রতিবেদন করার জন্য এবং কোন অনুষ্ঠানের উল্লেখের জন্য সংশ্লিষ্ট। পরবর্তীতে আমরা সংখ্যাগরিক উল্লেখযোগ্য উল্লেখ করে কাজের প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেবার জন্য জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করি। আমাদের অংশগ্রহণ নিউজ পাঠকের মান পরীক্ষা করেছে ইকেকেজির তৈরি করার জন্য, এবং কাজের প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদানের কারণে ইকেজিদের অনুষ্ঠানের পরিচয় এব', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sudjelovanje sustava NewsReadera u zadatku 5 za pola Eval-2018 o brojanju događaja i učesnika dugog repa. Novinarski čitač je generični neodređeni sistem obrade teksta koji otkriva događaje sa sudionicima, vremenom i mjestom za stvaranje grafika znanja događaja u centru događaja (ECKGs). Mi smo se minimalno prilagođavali ovim ECKG-ima kako bi uspostavili početnu izvršnost zadatka. Prvo koristimo ECKG-e kako bi utvrdili koji dokumenti prijavljuju o istom incidentu i koji je događaj spomenuo korisno. Sljedeće, skupljamo ECKG preko koreferencijalnih spomena i koristimo skupljeno znanje kako bi odgovorili na pitanja zadatka. Naša sudjelovanje testira kvalitet NewsReadera kako bi stvorila ECKG-e, kao i potencijal ECKG-a za uspostavljanje identiteta događaja i razloga zbog rezultata odgovora na pitanja zadataka.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme NewsReader-järjestelmän osallistumista SemEval-2018 Task 5 on Counting Events and Participants in the Long Tail -tapahtumaan. NewsReader on yleinen valvomaton tekstinkäsittelyjärjestelmä, joka tunnistaa tapahtumat osallistujien kanssa, ajan ja paikan luoda Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKG). Sovitimme nämä EKKG:t minimaalisesti määrittääksemme tehtävän perussuorituskyvyn. Käytämme ensin EKKG:tä selvittääksemme, mitkä asiakirjat raportoivat samasta tapahtumasta ja mitkä tapahtumat ovat rinnakkaisia. Seuraavaksi kokoamme EKKG:t yhteen rinnakkaismainintoihin ja käytämme yhdistettyä tietoa vastataksemme tehtävän kysymyksiin. Osallistumme testaamaan NewsReaderin laatua ECKG:ien luomisessa sekä ECKG:ien mahdollisuuksia määrittää tapahtumaidentiteetti ja järkeily tuloksen suhteen tehtäväkyselyihin vastaamiseksi.', 'ca': "En aquest article, descrivim la participació del sistema NewsReader en la tasca 5 de SemEval-2018 sobre Contar Events i Participants en Long Tail. NewsReader és un sistema genèric de processament de text sense supervisió que detecta esdeveniments amb participants, temps i lloc per generar Gràfics Centrals de Conèixements d'Events (ECKG). We minimally adapted these ECKGs to establish a baseline performance for the task.  Primer fem servir els ECKG per establir quins documents informen sobre el mateix incident i quin esdeveniment menciona són coreferents. Després, agreguem ECKG a través de mencions coreferents i utilitzem el coneixement agregat per respondre a les preguntes de la tasca. La nostra participació prova la qualitat de NewsReader per crear ECKG, i el potencial de ECKG per establir identitat d'eventos i raó sobre el resultat per respondre a les preguntes de tasca.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldame NewsReader süsteemi osalemist SemEval-2018 ülesandes 5, mis käsitleb sündmuste loendamist ja pikasabas osalejaid. NewsReader on üldine järelevalveta tekstitöötlussüsteem, mis tuvastab sündmused osalejatega, aja ja koha, et luua Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKG). Kohandasime neid EKKG-sid minimaalselt, et luua ülesande algtaseme tulemuslikkus. Kõigepealt kasutame EKKG-sid, et teha kindlaks, millised dokumendid teatavad samast intsidendist ja millised sündmused on seotud. Järgmisena koondame EKKG-d põhiliste märkuste kaupa ja kasutame koondatud teadmisi, et vastata ülesandega seotud küsimustele. Meie osalemine testib NewsReaderi kvaliteeti ECKG-ide loomisel ning ECKG-ide potentsiaali tuvastada sündmuse identiteet ja põhjendus tulemuse üle, et vastata ülesannete päringutele.', 'jv': 'Nang mapun iki, kita rambarang penggunaké ning acara tentang Haji-lawané ning seminval-2013 task 5 mung konter events lan patingkaran ning lung Tawih. New Awak dhéwé ngerti minimal nyebuti ESKG iki kanggo nggawe barang kanggo nggawe barang kanggo nggawe Awak dhéwé nggunakake perusahaan dengané ESKGs seneng nggawe dokumen sing berarti ujaran winih lan nganggep akèh dumadhiné surok ngono coreferasi winih. Tulung, awak dhéwé ngregani macem depsane corefer karo perusahaan langgar nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe gerakan ingkang dianggap kanggo nganggo perusahaan langgar. Kita perusahaan langkung wigatining cualitas ning New reader kanggo nggawe ESKGs, lan ampuhi perusahaan anyar dengan ESKGs kanggo nambah urip awak dhéwé karo perusahaan langkung wigatining mbukakipun dianggap kanggo ngilanggar ujaran pangan.', 'ha': "In this paper, we describe the participation of the NewsReader system in the SemEval-2018 Task 5 on Counting Events and Participants in the Long Tail.  @ action: button Mun sami waɗannan ECKGs da a ƙayyade zuwa an daidaita wani aikin kwanan aiki. @ info: whatsthis Ina ƙara, Munã samun ECKGs a kan karatun masu ambato na daban kuma Muke yi amfani da sanin da za'a karɓa wa masu tambayar aikin. Daga shirin mu, yana jarraba tsarin Mai Gafaka wa Akwai na ƙiƙiro ECKGs, da kuma awon ECKGs da za'a daidaita shaidar ayuka da saba kan ajir da tambayar aikin.", 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo sodelovanje sistema NewsReader v nalogi 5 SemEval-2018 o štetju dogodkov in udeležencev dolgega repa. NewsReader je generičen sistem za obdelavo besedila brez nadzora, ki zazna dogodke z udeleženci, čas in kraj za ustvarjanje Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKG). Te EKKG smo minimalno prilagodili, da bi določili osnovno uspešnost naloge. Najprej uporabimo EKKG, da ugotovimo, kateri dokumenti poročajo o istem incidentu in kateri dogodki so povezani. Nato združujemo EKKG med osrednjimi omembe in uporabimo združeno znanje za odgovore na vprašanja naloge. Naše sodelovanje preizkuša kakovost NewsReader za ustvarjanje ECKG-jev, kot tudi potencial ECKG-jev, da ugotovijo identiteto dogodka in razumejo rezultat za odgovore na poizvedbe opravil.', 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים את השתתפות של מערכת קריאת החדשות במשימה מס' 2018 על ספירת אירועים ומשתתפים בצד הארוך. NewsReader היא מערכת עיבוד טקסט לא מעוררת כללית שמגלה אירועים עם משתתפים, זמן ומקום לייצר גרפי ידע מרכזי אירועים (ECKGs). אנחנו מינימלית התאמנו את ECKG אלה כדי לקבוע ביצוע בסיסי למשימה. אנו משתמשים קודם ב ECKG כדי לקבוע איזה מסמכים מדווחים על אותו התקרית ואיזה אירוע מזכיר הם משמעותיים. לאחר מכן, אנו מארגנים ECKG דרך הזכרונות משותפים ולהשתמש בידע מארגן כדי לענות על שאלות המשימה. השתתפות שלנו מבחנת את איכות NewsReader כדי ליצור ECKG, כמו גם את הפוטנציאל של ECKG כדי לקבוע זהות אירוע והסיבה על התוצאה כדי לענות על שאלות המשימה.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་འགོད་པ་ལྟ་ཀློག་ནུས་མིང་གི་ནང་དུ་SemEval-2018 ལས་འགོད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་ཞུན་སྐྱོང་པ་ཚོའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ NewsReader is a generic unsupervised text processing system that detects events with participants, time and place to generate Event Centric Knowledge Graphs (ECKGs). ང་ཚོས་ECKGs་འདི་ཚོ་ཆུང་ཤོས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་འཛུགས་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ECKGs་ལ་ཐོག་མར་ཡིག་གེའི་དོན་ལ་སྐྱེས་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་རྣམས་གཅིག་གི་སྐྱེས་བ་ཞིག་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་ག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ECKGs་ལ་གནད་གནད་དོན་གྱི་སྐོར་གྱི་དཔེ་གཏོང་ཆོག་སྒྲིག་བྱས་པ་དེ་ཚོར་བ་སྤྱོད་དགོས། ང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་སྤེལ་བྱ་ཚིག་ལྟ་ཀློག་ཆས་ཀྱི་རེ་བ་ཐང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་གསར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་ནི་ECKGs ། བྱ་ཚིག་དང་རྒྱུ་མཚན་འདི་དག་འབྲས་བྱ་'}
{'en': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8 : Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'ar': 'مهمة SemEval-2018 8: الاستخراج الدلالي من تقارير الأمن السيبراني باستخدام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (SecureNLP)', 'es': 'Tarea 8 del SemeVal-2018: Extracción semántica de informes de ciberseguridad mediante procesamiento de lenguaje natural (SecureLP)', 'fr': "SemEval-2018 Tâche 8\xa0: Extraction sémantique à partir de rapports de cybersécurité à l'aide du traitement du langage naturel (SecureNLP)", 'pt': 'Tarefa 8 do SemEval-2018: extração semântica de relatórios de segurança cibernética usando processamento de linguagem natural (SecureNLP)', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク8 ：自然言語処理（ SecureNLP ）を使用したCybersecUrity REportsからのセマンティック抽出', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018 务 8:以自然语言处 (SecureNLP) 取语义于 CybersecUrity REports', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 8: प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (SecureNLP) का उपयोग कर CybersecUrity REports से शब्दार्थ निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'SemEval-2018 Задача 8: Семантическое извлечение из отчетов CybersecUrity с использованием обработки на естественном языке (SecureNLP)', 'ga': 'SemEval-2018 Tasc 8: Eastóscadh Séimeantach ó Thuarascálacha Cibearshlándála ag úsáid Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha (SecureNLP)', 'ka': 'SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 8: საიბერექსური რეპორტიდან Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'el': 'Εργασία 8: Σημαντική εξαγωγή από την κυβερνοασφάλεια με τη χρήση επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'SemEval-2018 feladat 8: Szemantikus kivonás a kiberbiztonsági újraportokból a természetes nyelv feldolgozásával (SecureNLP)', 'it': "SemEval-2018 Task 8: Estrazione semantica dalle reti di cybersecurity utilizzando l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (SecureNLP)", 'kk': 'SemEval-2018 Тапсырма 8: CybersecUrity репорттарынан Semantic Extraction using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'lt': 'SemEval-2018 8 8 užduotis: Semantinis kibernetinio šlapinimo pranešimų ekstrahavimas naudojant gamtinį kalbų apdorojimą (SecureNLP)', 'mk': 'SemEval-2018 задача 8: Семантична екстракција од CybersecUrity REports користејќи природен јазик процес (SecureNLP)', 'mt': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'ms': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Ekstraksi Semantik dari laporan laporan CybersecUrity menggunakan Proses Bahasa Alami (SecureNLP)', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'ml': 'സെമ്Eval- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 8: സൈബെര്\u200dസെക്രോക്ട്രേഷനില്\u200d നിന്നും സെമാന്റിക് എക്സ്ട്രാക്ട്രേഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതു് സാധാരണ ഭാഷ പ', 'no': 'SemEval-2018 Oppgåve 8: Semantisk utpakking frå sybersekUrity REporter ved bruk av naturleg språk- handsaming (SecureNLP)', 'pl': 'SemEval-2018 Zadanie 8: Ekstrakcja semantyczna z REportów cyberbezpieczeństwa przy użyciu przetwarzania języka naturalnego (SecureNLP)', 'ro': 'SemEval-2018 Sarcina 8: Extragerea semantică din reporturile de securitate cibernetică folosind procesarea limbajului natural (SecureNLP)', 'sr': 'SemEval-2018 zadatak 8: Semantička izvlačenja iz sajber sigurnosti izveštaja koristeći proces prirodnog jezika (SecureNLP)', 'si': 'Halfeval-2018 වැඩ 8: සායිබර්ස්කුරිටි ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය (SecureNLP) ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෙන් සෙමාන්ටික් ප්\u200d', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2018 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using the process of natural language (SecureNLP)', 'sv': 'SemEval-2018 Uppgift 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports with Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'ta': 'Я«џЯ»єЯ««Я»ЇEval- 2018 Я«фЯ«БЯ«┐', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: CybersecUrity REports from Semantic Extraction using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing (Secure NLP)', 'vi': 'Phân tích tinh dịch-thẩm 8: Phân tách tinh dịch từ lưu trữ mạng bằng chế độ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (SecureNLP)', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Семантично извличане от киберсигуреност чрез обработка на естествен език', 'nl': 'SemEval-2018 Taak 8: Semantische Extractie uit Cybersecurity REports met behulp van Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'hr': 'SemEval-2018 zadatak 8: Semantička izvlačenja iz rezultata CybersecUrity koristeći proces prirodnog jezika (SecureNLP)', 'da': 'SemEval-2018 Opgave 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'de': 'SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 8: Semantische Extraktion aus Cybersecurity REports mittels Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'id': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Ekstraksi Semantik dari laporan CybersecUrity menggunakan Proses Bahasa Alami (SecureNLP)', 'fa': 'ماموریت ۲۰۱۸: استخراج سیمنتیک از استفاده از پردازش زبان طبیعی (SecureNLP)', 'sw': 'SemEval-2018 Kazi 8: Kutengwa kwa hisia kutoka Mtandao', 'af': 'SemEval-2018 Opdrag 8: Semantiese uitpakking van Sibersekuriteit raporteer gebruik Natuurlike Taal Prosessering (SecureNLP)', 'tr': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'sq': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'am': 'ስምEval-2018 ስራ 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'hy': 'Սեմենտիկ արտահանումը Cyber- urey REPOrtsներից օգտագործելով բնական լեզվի մշակումը (Ավստահ ՆԼՊ)', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: CybersecUrity REportlarından Semantik Extraction using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'bs': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantička izvlačenja iz CybersecUrity REportova koristeći proces prirodnog jezika (SecureNLP)', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ৮: সাইবার সিক্রেক্রেট থেকে সেম্যান্টিক এক্সপ্রেক্রেশন স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া ব্যবহার করে (নিরাপত্ত', 'ca': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)', 'et': 'SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 8: Semantiline ekstraheerimine Cybersecurity REports kasutades loodusliku keele töötlemist (SecureNLP)', 'cs': 'SemEval-2018 Úloha 8: Sémantická extrakce z kyberbezpečnostních REportů pomocí zpracování přirozeného jazyka (SecureNLP)', 'fi': 'SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 8: Semanttinen poisto Cybersecurity REports käyttäen luonnollisen kielen käsittelyä (SecureNLP)', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 8: 보안 보고서에서 자연 언어 처리(SecurenLP)를 사용하여 의미 추출', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'SemEval-2018 Naloga 8: Semantno ekstrakcijo iz Cybersecurity REports z uporabo obdelave naravnega jezika (SecureNLP)', 'he': 'SemEval-2018 משימה 8: יציאה סמנטית מדווחים CybersecUrity באמצעות תהליך שפה טבעי (SecureNLP)', 'jv': 'semiinval-2008 task 8: semanti extration from CibersecUrty REports use Normal Language Progressing (Security urNLP)', 'bo': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing (SecureNLP)'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the SemEval 2018 shared task on semantic extraction from cybersecurity reports, which is introduced for the first time as a shared task on SemEval. This task comprises four SubTasks done incrementally to predict the characteristics of a specific malware using cybersecurity reports. To the best of our knowledge, we introduce the world’s largest publicly available dataset of annotated malware reports in this task. This task received in total 18 submissions from 9 participating teams.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مهمة SemEval 2018 المشتركة حول الاستخراج الدلالي من تقارير الأمن السيبراني ، والتي يتم تقديمها لأول مرة كمهمة مشتركة في SemEval. تتكون هذه المهمة من أربع مهام فرعية تتم بشكل متزايد للتنبؤ بخصائص برنامج ضار محدد باستخدام تقارير الأمن السيبراني. على حد علمنا ، نقدم أكبر مجموعة بيانات متاحة للجمهور في العالم لتقارير البرامج الضارة المشروحة في هذه المهمة. تلقت هذه المهمة ما مجموعه 18 مشاركة من 9 فرق مشاركة.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la tâche partagée SemEval 2018 sur l'extraction sémantique des rapports de cybersécurité, qui est introduite pour la première fois en tant que tâche partagée sur SemEval. Cette tâche comprend quatre sous-tâches effectuées de manière incrémentielle pour prédire les caractéristiques d'un logiciel malveillant spécifique à l'aide de rapports de cybersécurité. À notre connaissance, nous introduisons dans cette tâche le plus grand ensemble de données de rapports annotés sur les programmes malveillants accessibles au public au monde. Cette tâche a reçu au total 18 soumissions de 9 équipes participantes.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a tarefa compartilhada do SemEval 2018 sobre extração semântica de relatórios de segurança cibernética, que é apresentada pela primeira vez como uma tarefa compartilhada no SemEval. Essa tarefa compreende quatro subtarefas feitas de forma incremental para prever as características de um malware específico usando relatórios de segurança cibernética. Até onde sabemos, apresentamos o maior conjunto de dados disponível publicamente do mundo de relatórios de malware anotados nesta tarefa. Esta tarefa recebeu um total de 18 submissões de 9 equipes participantes.', 'es': 'Este documento describe la tarea compartida de SemEval 2018 sobre extracción semántica de informes de ciberseguridad, que se presenta por primera vez como una tarea compartida en SemEval. Esta tarea comprende cuatro subtareas que se realizan de forma incremental para predecir las características de un malware específico mediante informes de ciberseguridad. Hasta donde sabemos, en esta tarea presentamos el conjunto de datos de informes de malware anotados más grande del mundo disponible públicamente. Esta tarea recibió un total de 18 propuestas de 9 equipos participantes.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEvalの共有タスクとして初めて導入された、サイバーセキュリティレポートからのセマンティック抽出に関するSemEval 2018共有タスクについて説明します。このタスクには、サイバーセキュリティレポートを使用して特定のマルウェアの特性を予測するためにインクリメンタルに実行される4つのサブタスクが含まれています。私たちの知る限りでは、このタスクでは、注釈付きマルウェアレポートの世界最大の公開データセットを紹介します。このタスクには、9つの参加チームから合計18件の応募がありました。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval 2018年网络安全言取语义共享,其首为SemEval上者共之。 凡四增量之事,以网络安全告特定恶意软件。 据我们所知,我们在这里介绍了世界上最大的公明可用的带注恶意软件报告数据集。 凡得9参赛团队18意见书。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается совместная задача SemEval 2018 по семантическому извлечению из отчетов о кибербезопасности, которая впервые вводится в качестве совместной задачи в SemEval. Эта задача состоит из четырех подзадач, выполняемых постепенно для прогнозирования характеристик конкретного вредоносного ПО с использованием отчетов о кибербезопасности. Насколько нам известно, мы представляем крупнейший в мире общедоступный набор аннотированных отчетов о вредоносных программах в этой задаче. В рамках этой задачи было получено в общей сложности 18 представлений от 9 участвующих групп.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर साइबर सुरक्षा रिपोर्टों से शब्दार्थ निष्कर्षण पर SemEval 2018 साझा कार्य का वर्णन करता है, जिसे पहली बार SemEval पर साझा कार्य के रूप में पेश किया गया है। इस कार्य में साइबर सुरक्षा रिपोर्ट का उपयोग करके एक विशिष्ट मैलवेयर की विशेषताओं की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए वृद्धिशील रूप से किए गए चार उप-कार्य शामिल हैं। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, हम इस कार्य में एनोटेट मैलवेयर रिपोर्ट के दुनिया के सबसे बड़े सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध डेटासेट का परिचय देते हैं। इस कार्य को 9 प्रतिभागी टीमों से कुल 18 प्रस्तुतियों में प्राप्त हुआ।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar thasc roinnte SemEval 2018 ar eastóscadh shéimeantach ó thuarascálacha cybersecurity, a thugtar isteach den chéad uair mar thasc roinnte ar SemEval. Cuimsíonn an tasc seo ceithre Fhothasc a dhéantar go hincriminteach chun saintréithe malware ar leith a thuar ag baint úsáide as tuarascálacha cibearshlándála. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, tugaimid isteach an tacar sonraí is mó ar domhan de thuairiscí mailíseacha anótáilte atá ar fáil go poiblí sa tasc seo. Fuair an tasc seo 18 n-aighneacht san iomlán ó 9 bhfoireann rannpháirteacha.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 közös feladatát a kiberbiztonsági jelentésekből való szemantikai kivonással kapcsolatban, amelyet első alkalommal vezettek be a SemEval közös feladataként. Ez a feladat négy alcsoportból áll, amelyeket fokozatosan végeznek egy adott rosszindulatú programok jellemzőinek előrejelzésére a kiberbiztonsági jelentések segítségével. Legjobb tudásunk szerint ebben a feladatban bemutatjuk a világ legnagyobb nyilvánosan elérhető, jegyzetelt rosszindulatú programjelentésekből álló adatkészletét. Ez a feladat összesen 18 pályázatot kapott 9 résztvevő csapattól.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την κοινή εργασία σχετικά με τη σημασιολογική εξαγωγή από αναφορές ασφάλειας στον κυβερνοχώρο, η οποία εισάγεται για πρώτη φορά ως κοινή εργασία στο SemEval. Αυτή η εργασία περιλαμβάνει τέσσερις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες που γίνονται σταδιακά για την πρόβλεψη των χαρακτηριστικών ενός συγκεκριμένου κακόβουλου λογισμικού χρησιμοποιώντας αναφορές ασφάλειας στον κυβερνοχώρο. Από ό,τι γνωρίζουμε, εισάγουμε το μεγαλύτερο δημοσίως διαθέσιμο σύνολο δεδομένων σχολιασμένων αναφορών κακόβουλου λογισμικού στον κόσμο σε αυτήν την εργασία. Το έργο αυτό έλαβε συνολικά 18υποβολές από εννέα συμμετέχουσες ομάδες.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის გამოსახულება SemEval 2018-ის საზოგადოებული საქმენტიკური გამოყენებაზე, რომელიც საიბერსკუმენტიკური გამოსახულებებიდან იყენება, რომელიც პირველი ჯერ SemEval- ეს დავალება იქნება ოთხი SubTasks, რომელიც აკეთებულად გავაკეთებულია სპეციფიკალური მუშაობის პარამეტრებების გამოყენებაში. ჩვენი უკეთესი ცნობილებისთვის, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ მსოფლიოს უფრო დიდი საზოგადოებელი მონაცემების შესაბამისი მონაცემების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შე ეს დავალება მიიღეთ საერთო 18 წინაწერებაში 9 წინაწერებული ჯგუფიდან.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il compito condiviso SemEval 2018 sull'estrazione semantica dai report di sicurezza informatica, che viene introdotto per la prima volta come un compito condiviso su SemEval. Questa attività comprende quattro attività secondarie eseguite incrementalmente per prevedere le caratteristiche di un malware specifico utilizzando report sulla sicurezza informatica. Per quanto ci risulta, in questo compito presentiamo il più grande set di dati pubblico disponibile al mondo di report malware annotati. Questo compito ha ricevuto in totale 18 contributi da 9 squadre partecipanti.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың semiEval бөлінген тапсырманы сайттық қауіпсіздік хабарламалардан бірінші рет бөлінген тапсырманы Semantic extraction туралы анықтайды. Бұл бірінші рет SemEval жұмыс істе Бұл тапсырма көмектесу хабарламаларды көмектесу үшін төрт SubTasks жасалған көмектесу үшін көмектесетін төрт бағдарламалардың қасиеттерін таңдау үшін болады. Біздің біліміміздің ең жақсы түсініктерімізге, әлемдегі ең үлкен қол жеткізетін деректер жиынын осы тапсырманың ең маңызды ескертулер туралы таңдаймыз. Бұл тапсырма 9 қатысушы тобынан 18 жіберілген.', 'ml': 'സൈബെര്\u200dസിക്ക് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്ത സെമാന്റിക്ക് പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ഈ പേപ്പറിനെ വിവര സൈബെര്\u200d സെക്യൂരിറ്റി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു പ്രത്യേക പ്രത്യേക തെറ്റുകളുടെ സ്വഭാവം പ്രവചിപ്പിക്ക നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ലതിന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ലോകത്തിലെ ഏറ്റവും വലിയ പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു ഈ ജോലി 9 പങ്കെടുക്കുന്ന ടീമില്\u200d നിന്ന് മൊത്തം 18 കീഴ്പ്പെട്ടു.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ја опишува заедничката задача на SemEval 2018 за семантичното извлекување од извештаите за кибер-безбедност, која за првпат е воведена како заедничка задача на SemEval. This task comprises four SubTasks done incrementally to predict the characteristics of a specific malware using cybersecurity reports.  За најдобро од нашето знаење, ги претставуваме најголемите јавно достапни податоци од анотираните извештаи за малопрема во оваа задача. Оваа задача доби вкупно 18 поднесувања од 9 учествувачки тимови.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan tugas berkongsi SemEval 2018 mengenai ekstraksi semantik dari laporan keselamatan siber, yang diperkenalkan untuk pertama kalinya sebagai tugas berkongsi pada SemEval. Tugas ini mengandungi empat Sub-Tugas yang dilakukan secara bertambah untuk meramalkan ciri-ciri perisian cacat khusus menggunakan laporan keselamatan siber. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kami, kami memperkenalkan set data terbesar di dunia yang tersedia secara awam dari laporan malware yang dicatat dalam tugas ini. Tugas ini diterima dalam total 18 penghantaran dari 9 pasukan yang berpartisipasi.', 'mt': 'This paper describes the SemEval 2018 shared task on semantic extraction from cybersecurity reports, which is introduced for the first time as a shared task on SemEval.  Dan il-kompitu jinkludi erba’ Sottokompiti magħmula inkrementalment biex jipprevedu l-karatteristiċi ta’ malware speċifiku bl-użu ta’ rapporti dwar iċ-ċibersigurtà. Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, aħna nintroduċu l-akbar sett ta’ dejta disponibbli pubblikament fid-dinja ta’ rapporti anotati dwar il-malware f’dan il-kompitu. Dan il-kompitu rċieva b’kollox 18-il sottomissjoni minn 9 timijiet parteċipanti.', 'mn': 'Энэ баримт 2018 оны SemEval-ын салбарын аюулгүй байдлын мэдээллээс SemEval-ын хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааг анх удаа танилцуулсан юм. Энэ үйл ажиллагаанд 4 SubTasks нь цайбрийн аюулгүй мэдээллийг ашиглан тодорхой зэвсэг зэвсэглэгчийн харилцааны чанарыг таамаглах тулд нэмэгдүүлсэн 4 SubTasks-г агуулдаг. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь бид дэлхийн хамгийн их олон нийтэд хэрэглэгддэг мэдээллийн бүтээгдэхүүнийг энэ ажил дээр танилцуулдаг. Энэ ажил 9 оролцогчдын 18 даалгаврыг авсан.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver semiEval 2018 delt oppgåva om semantisk utpakking frå cybersecurity rapporter, som vert introdusert for første gong som delt oppgåve på semiEval. Denne oppgåva inneheld fire underoppgåver utførte for å foregå karakteristikaren til ein spesifikke malvare ved hjelp av cybersecurity reports. For det beste av våre kunnskap, introduserer vi den største offentlig tilgjengelege datasettet i verden av notaterte malvareporter i denne oppgåva. Denne oppgåva motteken i totalt 18 tillegg frå 9 deltakende grupper.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje wspólne zadanie SemEval 2018 dotyczące ekstrakcji semantycznej z raportów cyberbezpieczeństwa, które po raz pierwszy zostało wprowadzone jako wspólne zadanie na SemEval. Zadanie to obejmuje cztery podzadania wykonywane stopniowo w celu przewidzenia charakterystyki konkretnego złośliwego oprogramowania za pomocą raportów cyberbezpieczeństwa. Zgodnie z naszą najlepszą wiedzą w tym zadaniu wprowadzamy największy na świecie publicznie dostępny zestaw danych z adnotacjami złośliwego oprogramowania. Zadanie to otrzymało w sumie osiemnastu zgłoszeń od dziewięciu uczestniczących zespołów.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sarcina comună SemEval 2018 privind extragerea semantică din rapoartele de securitate cibernetică, care este introdusă pentru prima dată ca sarcină comună pe SemEval. Această sarcină cuprinde patru subsarcini efectuate treptat pentru a prezice caracteristicile unui anumit malware utilizând rapoarte de securitate cibernetică. Din câte știm, introducem cel mai mare set de date disponibil public din lume de rapoarte malware adnotate în această sarcină. Această sarcină a primit în total 18 depuneri de la 9 echipe participante.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje zajednièki zadatak u semiEvalu 2018. godine o semantičkoj ekstrakciji iz izveštaja o sajber sigurnosti, koji je prvi put uveden kao zajednièki zadatak o semiEvalu. Ovaj zadatak sastoji od četiri SubTaska koji su veoma napravljeni kako bi predvidjeli karakteristike specifičnog malvera koristeći izveštaje o sajber sigurnosti. Najbolje od naših znanja, predstavljamo najveći javno dostupni podaci o izveštajima o annotiranim malware u ovom zadatku. Ovaj zadatak je dobio ukupno 18 podataka od 9 sudionika.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama bendra 2018 m. SemEval užduotis semantiniam kibernetinio saugumo ataskaitų gavimui, kuri pirmą kartą pateikiama kaip bendra SemEval užduotis. Šią užduotį sudaro keturios papildomos užduotys, atliekamos palaipsniui tam tikros netinkamos įrangos savybėms prognozuoti naudojant kibernetinio saugumo ataskaitas. Geriausiomis žiniomis mes pristatome didžiausius pasaulyje viešai prieinamus anotuotų blogosios įrangos pranešimų rinkinius šioje užduotyje. This task received in total 18 submissions from 9 participating teams.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay shaqada SemEval 2018 oo la qaybsaday oo ku saabsan soo saaridda semantika ee wargelinta ammaanka shabakadda, kaas oo marka ugu horeysa lagu soo bandhigay shaqada SemEval. Shaqadan waxaa kamid ah afar shaqo oo lagu sameeyay si aad u sii daro in lagu sii sheego alaabta khaaska ah oo lagu isticmaalo wargelinta ammaanka shabakadda. Tan ugu wanaagsan aqoontayada, waxan shaqadan ku soo bandhignaa taarifka macluumaadka caalamka ee ugu weyn ee caalamka ah oo la helay. Shaqadaasu waxay ka heleen 18 samooyin oo ka mid ah kooxa 9 qayb-qaadashada.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver SemEval 2018 delade uppgift om semantisk extraktion från cybersäkerhetsrapporter, som introduceras för första gången som en delad uppgift på SemEval. Den här uppgiften omfattar fyra underuppgifter som görs stegvis för att förutsäga egenskaperna hos en specifik skadlig kod med hjälp av cybersäkerhetsrapporter. Så vitt vi vet introducerar vi världens största offentligt tillgängliga dataset av kommenterade malware-rapporter i denna uppgift. Denna uppgift fick totalt 18 bidrag från 9 deltagande lag.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වල සායිබර්සුකුරිත් වාර්තාවෙන් සෙම්වෙල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් ගැන සෙම්වෙල් වැඩක් විතරයි. මේ වැඩේ සායිබර් සුරක්ෂිත වාර්තාවක් භාවිත කරන්න විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජන අපේ දැනගන්න හොඳම දැනගන්න, අපි ලෝකයේ ලොකු ලොකු ලොකු ලොකු ලොකු ලොකු ලොකු දත්ත සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ මේ වැඩයේ අන මේ වැඩේ සම්පූර්ණයෙන් කණ්ඩායම් 9 වලින් 18 කණ්ඩායමක් ලැබුනා.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை செம்Eval 2018 பகிர்ந்த பணியை விவரிக்கிறது சைப்பர் பாதுகாப்பு அறிக்கைகளில் இருந்து பாதுகாப்பு வெளியேற்றத்தில் இருந Name எங்கள் அறிவின் சிறந்த முறையில், நாங்கள் உலகின் பெரிய பிரச்சனையில் கிடைக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்பை அறிவிக்கிறோம் இந்த பண இந்த செயல் 9 பங்கிடும் குழுக்களிலிருந்து மொத்தமான 18 சரணங்கள் கிடைத்தது.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the SemEval 2018 shared task on semantic extraction from cybersecurity reports, which is introduced for the first time as a shared task on SemEval. یہ کام چار SubTasks میں شامل ہے جو ایک مخصوص مالویر کی خصوصی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے اضافہ کیا گیا ہے۔ ہمارے سب سے بہترین علم کے لئے، ہم دنیا کی سب سے بڑی عمومی دسترسی ڈیٹ سٹ کو اس کام میں آگاہ کر رہے ہیں. This task received in total 18 submissions from 9 participating teams.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval 2018 SemEval SemEval haqidagi semantik xabarlardan birlashtirilgan vazifani anglatadi. Bu SemEval uchun birinchi marta qaytarilgan vazifa deb belgilangan. Name Biz eng eng yaxshi aniqlanimiz uchun dunyoning eng katta shaxsiy maʼlumot tarkibini ko'rganamiz. Bu vazifani ko'rsatilgan xato haqida ko'rsatilgan xabar tarkibini ko'rsamiz. Bu vazifa 9 bo'lgan guruhdan butunlay 18 submit qabul qildi.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này mô tả nhiệm vụ chia sẻ của Semkhai thác theo ngữ pháp từ báo cáo an ninh mạng, được đưa ra lần đầu như một nhiệm vụ chia sẻ về SemEvol. Nhiệm vụ này gồm bốn con SubTasks làm theo kế hoạch dự đoán các đặc trưng của một phần mềm đặc biệt bằng các báo cáo an ninh mạng. Theo hiểu biết tốt nhất của chúng tôi, chúng tôi xin giới thiệu tập tin dữ liệu lớn nhất công khai có s ẵn trên thế giới về các báo cáo virus đã ghi chú trong nhiệm vụ này. Nhiệm vụ này được nhận trong hoàn toàn 18 người tham gia nhóm.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва споделената задача за семантично извличане от доклади за киберсигурност, която е въведена за първи път като споделена задача на СемЕвал. Тази задача се състои от четири подзадачи, извършени постепенно, за да се предвидят характеристиките на конкретен злонамерен софтуер чрез доклади за киберсигурност. Доколкото знаем, ние въвеждаме най-големия обществено достъпен набор от данни от анотирани доклади за зловреден софтуер в света в тази задача. Тази задача получи общо 18 предложения от 9 участващи отбора.', 'nl': "Dit artikel beschrijft de SemEval 2018 gedeelde taak over semantische extractie uit cybersecurity rapporten, die voor het eerst wordt geïntroduceerd als een gedeelde taak op SemEval. Deze taak omvat vier SubTasks die incrementel worden uitgevoerd om de kenmerken van een specifieke malware te voorspellen met behulp van cyberbeveiligingsrapporten. Voor zover we weten introduceren we 's werelds grootste publiek beschikbare dataset van geannoteerde malwarerapporten in deze taak. Deze taak ontving in totaal 18 inzendingen van negen deelnemende teams.", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die SemEval 2018 Shared Task zur semantischen Extraktion aus Cybersicherheitsberichten, die erstmals als Shared Task auf SemEval vorgestellt wird. Diese Aufgabe umfasst vier Teilaufgaben, die schrittweise durchgeführt werden, um die Eigenschaften einer bestimmten Malware mithilfe von Cybersicherheitsberichten vorherzusagen. Nach bestem Wissen stellen wir in dieser Aufgabe den weltweit größten öffentlich zugänglichen Datensatz kommentierter Malware-Berichte vor. Diese Aufgabe erhielt insgesamt 18-Einreichungen von neun teilnehmenden Teams.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver SemEval 2018 delte opgave om semantisk udtrækning fra cybersikkerhedsrapporter, som introduceres for første gang som en delt opgave på SemEval. Denne opgave omfatter fire underopgaver, der udføres trinvist for at forudsige karakteristika for en bestemt malware ved hjælp af cybersikkerhedsrapporter. Så vidt vi ved, introducerer vi verdens største offentligt tilgængelige datasæt af annoterede malware rapporter i denne opgave. Denne opgave modtog i alt 18 indsendelser fra 9 deltagende hold.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan tugas berbagi SemEval 2018 tentang ekstraksi semantis dari laporan cybersecurity, yang diperkenalkan untuk pertama kalinya sebagai tugas berbagi SemEval. Tugas ini terdiri dari empat SubTask yang dilakukan secara incremental untuk memprediksi karakteristik malware spesifik menggunakan laporan cybersecurity. Menurut pengetahuan terbaik kami, kami memperkenalkan dataset terbesar di dunia yang tersedia publik dari laporan malware yang dicatat dalam tugas ini. Tugas ini menerima total 18 pengiriman dari 9 tim yang berpartisipasi.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje zajednički zadatak SemEval 2018 o semantičkom izvlačenju iz izvještaja o sajber sigurnosti, koji se prvi put uvodi kao zajednički zadatak o SemEval. Ovaj zadatak uključuje četiri SubTasks obavljene većinom kako bi predvidjela karakteristike specifičnog malvera koristeći izvještaje o sajber sigurnosti. Najbolje od naših znanja, predstavljamo najveću javno dostupnu podatku svijeta izvještaja o annotiranim malopravnim izvještajima u ovom zadatku. Ovaj zadatak je dobio ukupno 18 podataka od 9 sudionih timova.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ کار نصف سال ۲۰۱۸ را در مورد استخراج از گزارش\u200cهای سیب\u200cامنیتی مشترک می\u200cکند که برای اولین بار به عنوان یک کار مشترک در سیم\u200cاول معرفی می\u200cشود. این وظیفه با استفاده از گزارش\u200cهای محافظت سایبر، چهار SubTasks بسیار بیشتر انجام شده است تا ویژگی\u200cهای یک خرابکاری خاص را پیش بینی کند. برای بهترین دانش ما، ما بزرگترین مجموعه داده های عمومی در دنیا از گزارش های ناپسندیده\u200cای در این کار معرفی می\u200cکنیم. این وظیفه در کل ۱۸ فرستادن از ۹ تیم مشترک دریافت شد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea jukumu la SemEval 2018 lililoshirikishwa juu ya utekelezaji wa kimapenzi kutoka kwenye taarifa za usalama wa mtandaoni, ambazo linaanzishwa kwa mara ya kwanza kama kazi ya kushirikiana kwenye SemEval. Kazi hii inajumuisha kazi nne za Mipango zilizofanya kwa kiasi kikubwa kutabiri sifa za vifaa maalum kwa kutumia taarifa za usalama wa mtandaoni. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, tunaonyesha seti ya taarifa zinazopatikana hadharani zaidi duniani zinazoripoti vibaya katika kazi hii. Kazi hii ilipata ujumbe wa jumla 18 kutoka timu 9 ya ushiriki.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die SemEval 2018 gedeelde taak op semantiese uittrekking van sybersekuriteitsraporte, wat vir die eerste keer as 'n gedeelde taak op SemEval ingestel word. Hierdie taak bevat vier SubTasks gedoen incrementaal om die karakteristieke van 'n spesifieke malware te voorskou deur die gebruik van sybersekuriteitsraporte te gebruik. Op die beste van ons kennis, introduseer ons die grootste publiek beskikbare datastel van annotated malware raporte in hierdie taak. Hierdie taak ontvang in totaal 18 onderskrifte van 9 deelnadeerde teams.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan detyrën e përbashkët të SemEval 2018 mbi nxjerrjen semantike nga raportet e sigurisë kibernetike, e cila futet për herë të parë si një detyrë e përbashkët në SemEval. Kjo detyrë përfshin katër nëndetyra të kryera gradualisht për të parashikuar karakteristikat e një malware specifik duke përdorur raportet e sigurisë kibernetike. Për më të mirën e njohurive tona, ne prezantojmë të dhënat më të mëdha publikisht të disponueshme në botë të raporteve të shënuara të programeve të keqe në këtë detyrë. Kjo detyrë mori në total 18 paraqitje nga 9 ekipe pjesëmarrëse.', 'am': "ይህ ገጽ የSemEval 2018 የሳምEval ስራ ለፊተኛው ጊዜ በሴምEval የተካፈለ ስራ ለመጀመሪያ የተገኘ ነው፡፡ ይህ ስራ በሳብበር ደህንነት ሪፖርት በመጠቀም የተመሳሳይ የስህተት ግንኙነትን ለመግለጥ አራት ደብዳቤዎችን የሚያደርጉት ስራዎችን የሚያሳውቅ ነው፡፡ To the best of our knowledge, we introduce the world's largest publicly available dataset of annotated malware reports in this task.  ይህ ስራ ከ9 ተካያፊዎች ቡድን በሙሉ 18 ጥልቶች ተቀበለ።", 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval paylaşdığı işləri sajber təhlükəsizlik raporlarından semantik çıxarılması haqqında təsbiq edir. Bu, SemEval haqqında ilk dəfə paylaşdığı işlər kimi təsbiq edilir. Bu görev, kibertəhlükəsizlik raportlarını istifadə etmək üçün müəyyən bir malware xüsusiyyətlərinin təsəvvür etmək üçün artıqlıq etdiyi dörd SubTask içərilidir. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşıs ına görə, bu işdə dünyanın ən böyük mümkün verilən malware raporlarını tanıyırıq. Bu görev 9 iştirakçı dəstələrindən toplam 18 göndərildi.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է 2018 թվականի "Սեմեվալ" կիսմանտիկ հանձնարարությունը կիբեր վստահության զեկույցներից, որը առաջին անգամ ներկայացվում է որպես "Սեմեվալ" կիսմանտիկ հանձնարարություն: Այս հանձնարարությունը կազմում է չորս ենթահանձնարարներ, որոնք կատարվում են անընդհատ որոշակի սխալ ծրագրի հատկությունների կանխատեսման համար, օգտագործելով կիբեր ապահովության զեկույցներ: Մեր լավագույն գիտելիքներից մեկն այն է, որ մենք ներկայացնում ենք աշխարհի ամենամեծ հանրային հասանելի տվյալների համակարգը, որը ներկայացնում է այս խնդրի մեջ գրված վատ ծրագրեր: Այս խնդիրը ընդհանրապես 18 ներկայացումներ ստացավ 9 մասնակցում խմբից:', 'bn': 'This paper describes the SemEval 2018 shared task on semantic extraction from cybersecurity reports, which is introduced for the first time as a shared task on SemEval.  এই কাজটি সাইবার নিরাপত্তা রিপোর্ট ব্যবহার করে একটি নির্দিষ্ট অলওয়্যারের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী ভবিষ্যদ্ব আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোর জন্য, আমরা বিশ্বের সবচেয়ে বড় প্রকাশ্যে প্রকাশিত তথ্যের সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত তথ্যে ৯ অংশগ্রহণকারী দল থেকে পুরোপুরি ১৮ টি কাজ পেয়েছে।', 'ko': '본고는 SemEval 2018 네트워크 보안 보고서의 의미 추출 공유 임무를 묘사하는데 이 임무는 처음으로SemEval의 공유 임무로 도입되었다.이 임무는 네트워크 보안 보고서를 통해 특정 악성 소프트웨어의 특징을 점차적으로 예측하는 네 개의 하위 임무를 포함한다.이 작업에서 세계 최대의 공개적으로 얻을 수 있는 악성 소프트웨어 보고서 데이터 집합을 소개할 것으로 알고 있습니다.이 임무는 총 9개 참여팀이 제출한 18건의 의견서를 받았다.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje zajednički zadatak SemEval 2018 o semantičkom izvlačenju iz izvještaja o sajber sigurnosti, koji se prvi put uvede kao zajednički zadatak o semiEvalu. Ovaj zadatak uključuje četiri SubTask obavljene većinom kako bi predvidjela karakteristike specifičnog malvera koristeći izvještaje o sajber sigurnosti. Najbolje od naših znanja, predstavljamo najveću javno dostupnu podatku na svijetu izvještaja o annotiranim malverznim izvještajima u ovom zadatku. Ovaj zadatak je dobio ukupno 18 podataka od 9 sudionih timova.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval 2018-nji ýylda Semantik gürrüňlik raporlardan çykmaklyk bilen ylalaşyk zadyny SemEval hakynda ilkinji gezek bellenilýär. Bu zady kibersecuritet raporlaryny ulanan hasaplanyň häsiýetlerini çaklamak üçin dört SubTasklerdir. Bilgimiziň iň gowy bolsa, dünýäniň iň uly publika meňzeş malware hasaplarynyň bardygyny tanyşdyrýarys. Bu zady 9 topardan bäri goşulýan topardan 18 gönderilmesi aldy.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu la tasca compartida SemEval 2018 sobre l'extracció semàntica dels informes de cibersiguretat, que es presenta per primera vegada com una tasca compartida en SemEval. Aquesta tasca consisteix en quatre Subtasques fetes incrementalment per predir les característiques d'un malware específic utilitzant informes de cibersiguretat. Per millor del nostre coneixement, introduïm el conjunt de dades més gran del món disponible públicament d'informes de malware anotats en aquesta tasca. Aquesta tasca va rebre en total 18 presentacions de 9 equips participants.", 'et': "Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2018 ühist ülesannet semantilise ekstraheerimise kohta küberturvalisuse aruannetest, mida tutvustatakse esimest korda SemEval'i jagatud ülesandena. See ülesanne koosneb neljast alamülesandest, mida tehakse järk-järgult konkreetse pahavara omaduste prognoosimiseks küberturvalisuse aruannete abil. Parima teadmise kohaselt tutvustame selles ülesandes maailma suurimat avalikult kättesaadavat märgitud pahavara aruannete andmekogumit. See ülesanne sai kokku 18 avaldust 9 osalevalt meeskonnalt.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2018:n jaettua tehtävää semanttisesta poimimisesta kyberturvallisuusraporteista, joka esitellään ensimmäistä kertaa SemEvalin yhteisenä tehtävänä. Tämä tehtävä koostuu neljästä osatehtävästä, jotka tehdään asteittain tietyn haittaohjelman ominaisuuksien ennustamiseksi kyberturvallisuusraporttien avulla. Tietojemme mukaan esittelemme tässä tehtävässä maailman suurimman julkisesti saatavilla olevan tietojoukon huomautuksilla varustettuja haittaohjelmaraportteja. Tähän tehtävään osallistui yhteensä 18 hakemusta 9 tiimiltä.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje sdílený úkol SemEval 2018 týkající se sémantické extrakce ze zpráv o kybernetické bezpečnosti, který je poprvé představen jako sdílený úkol na SemEval. Tento úkol zahrnuje čtyři podúkoly prováděné postupně k předpovědi charakteristik konkrétního malwaru pomocí zpráv o kybernetické bezpečnosti. Podle našich nejlepších znalostí představujeme největší veřejně dostupnou datovou sadu anotovaných hlášení malwaru na světě. Tento úkol obdržel celkem osmnáct příspěvků od devíti zúčastněných týmů.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambarang kelas semensic extration diputara winih, yang diputara sampek tanggal semanci kapan tanggal sembersecurity barang, nggawe Awak dhéwé nggawe sapa perusahaan kelas kotak nggawe seminval. task-type Awak dhéwé, ngéwé ngertuakaké awak dhéwé, éntuk dhéwé nggawe dataset sing gak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang kelompok maliter barang iki. Omahno iki wis rampung 18 isura menyang sampeyan 9 rambarang', 'ha': 'Wannan karatun na describe the SemEal 2018 share aikin na shari a kan nuna na semantic daga canza tsarin cybers, which is introduced for the first time as a raba wani aikin da aka yi share a kan SemEal. This task comprises four SubTasks done incrementally to predict the characteristics of a specific malware using cybersecurity reports.  Ga da mafi kyaun saninmu, muna gauraya da takardar data masu iya bayyani a duniya masu cikin wannan aikin da aka buga karya. Wannan aikin ya motsa da dukkan 18 masu sallama daga ƙungiyõyi 9.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisano skupno nalogo SemEval 2018 o semantičnem ekstrakciji iz poročil o kibernetski varnosti, ki je prvič predstavljeno kot skupno nalogo na SemEvalu. Ta naloga vključuje štiri podnaloge, izvedene postopoma za napoved značilnosti določene zlonamerne programske opreme s poročili o kibernetski varnosti. Kolikor vemo, predstavljamo največji javno dostopen nabor podatkov o poročilih o zlonamerni programski opremi z oznakami na svetu. Ta naloga je prejela skupaj 18 prispevkov 9 sodelujočih ekip.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המשימה המשותפת של SemEval 2018 על החולץ סמנטי מדו"חות Cybersecurity, אשר הוציא בפעם הראשונה כמשימה משותפת על SemEval. This task comprises four SubTasks done incrementally to predict the characteristics of a specific malware using cybersecurity reports.  לפי הידע הטוב ביותר שלנו, אנחנו מציגים את קבוצת הנתונים הגדולה ביותר בעולם שזמינה לציבור של דו"חות מתוכנות רעות מוכתבים במשימה הזו. המשימה הזאת קיבלה בסך הכל 18 הודעות מ-9 קבוצות משתתפות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval 2018་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་semantic extraction from cybersecurity reports་ལས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། བྱ་འགུལ་འདིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཅིག་གི་རྐྱེན་ཆ་བཞིན་ཡོད་དོན་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཆེད་དུ་དམིགས་པ་ཤེས་དུ་འཇིག་རྟེན་འདིའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྟོན་ནི། བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་ཚོ་ཁག་གཟའ་ཚང་འགོད་པའི་ལྡོག་ཁང་༩༨་ཡིས་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'DM_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 8 : neural sequence labeling with linguistic features', 'ar': 'DM_NLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 8: وضع العلامات على التسلسل العصبي بسمات لغوية', 'pt': 'DM_NLP na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 8: rotulagem de sequência neural com recursos linguísticos', 'es': 'DM_NLP en SemEval-2018 Tarea 8: etiquetado de secuencias neuronales con características lingüísticas', 'fr': 'DM_NLP à SEMEval-2018 Tâche 8\xa0: étiquetage de séquences neuronales avec caractéristiques linguistiques', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のDM_NLPタスク8 ：言語学的特徴を持つニューラルシーケンスラベリング', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 8 पर DM_NLP: भाषाई विशेषताओं के साथ तंत्रिका अनुक्रम लेबलिंग', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018事8 DM_NLP:有言语神经序', 'ru': 'DM_NLP на SemEval-2018 Задача 8: маркировка нейронной последовательности с лингвистическими признаками', 'ga': 'DM_NLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 8: lipéadú seicheamh néarúil le gnéithe teangeolaíocha', 'ka': 'DM', 'hu': 'DM_NLP a SemEval-2018 8. feladat: neurális szekvencia címkézés nyelvi jellemzőkkel', 'el': 'Εργασία 8: σήμανση νευρωνικής ακολουθίας με γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά', 'it': 'DM_NLP a SemEval-2018 Task 8: etichettatura delle sequenze neurali con caratteristiche linguistiche', 'kk': 'DM_ NLP жарым- 2018 тапсырма 8: лингвистикалық қасиеттермен невралдық реттеу жарлығы', 'ms': 'DM_NLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: label urutan saraf dengan ciri-ciri bahasa', 'mk': 'DM_NLP на SemEval-2018 задача 8: нервна секвенца со ознака со јазични карактеристики', 'mn': 'DM_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 8: neural sequence labeling with linguistic features', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 8-ല്\u200d DM_ NLP: ഭാഷക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ്', 'no': 'DM_NLP ved semiEval-2018 Oppgåve 8: neuralsekvensetiketting med lingviske funksjonar', 'lt': 'DM_NLP SemEval-2018 8 užduotis: nervų sekos ženklinimas kalbinėmis savybėmis', 'ro': 'DM_NLP la SemEval-2018 Task 8: etichetarea secvențelor neurale cu caracteristici lingvistice', 'sr': 'DM_NLP na semiEval-2018 Task 8: etiketiranje neuralne sekvence sa lingviskim karakteristikama', 'si': 'DEM_NLP at Halfeval-2018 Job 8: neural sequence label with language', 'mt': 'DM_NLP f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 8: tikkettar tas-sekwenza newrali b’karatteristiċi lingwistiċi', 'pl': 'Zadanie 8: etykietowanie sekwencji neuronowej z cechami językowymi', 'so': 'DM_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Neural sequence labeling with linguistic features', 'sv': 'DM_NLP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 8: Neural sekvensmärkning med språkliga funktioner', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 8: மொழி குணங்களுடன் குறிப்பிடும் புதிய தொடர்', 'ur': 'DM_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 8: neural sequence labeling with linguistic features', 'vi': 'M.M., Nchọc dò tại Semkhai-thẩm 8: hiệu ứng phân tử thần kinh với các tính năng ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Vazifani SemEval- 2018 da DM_ NLP 8: lingvistik featurelari bilan labelsin neural sequence', 'bg': 'Задача 8: етикетиране на невронната последователност с лингвистични характеристики', 'da': 'DM_NLP ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 8: Neural sekvensmærkning med sproglige funktioner', 'nl': 'DM_NLP bij SemEval-2018 Taak 8: neurale sequentie labeling met linguïstische kenmerken', 'id': 'DM_NLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: urutan saraf label dengan fitur bahasa', 'hr': 'DM_NLP na semiEval-2018 zadatak 8: označavanje neuralne sekvence s jezičkim funkcijama', 'de': 'DM_NLP bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 8: Neuronale Sequenzmarkierung mit linguistischen Merkmalen', 'sw': 'DM_NLP katika SemEval-2018 Task 8: mfululizo wa neura unaohusika na vipengele vya lugha', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 8에서 DM NLP: 언어 특성이 있는 신경 시퀀스 태그', 'fa': 'DM_NLP در ماموریت ۲۰۱۸: برچسب ترکیب عصبی با ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی', 'tr': 'DM_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 8: neural sequence labeling with linguistic features', 'hy': 'DM_NSP-ը, որը գտնվում է «ՍեմԷվալ-2018» 8-րդ գործում. լեզվաբանական հատկանիշներով նյարդային հաջորդականության պիտակ տալը', 'af': 'DM_NLP by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 8: neurale volgorde etiket met lingvisiese funksies', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ৮-এ DM_NLP: ভাষাভাষী বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে লেবেল করা নিউরেল সেকেন্স', 'bs': 'DM_NLP na semiEval-2018 Task 8: etiketiranje neuralne sekvence sa jezičkim karakteristikama', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'cs': 'DM_NLP na SemEval-2018 Úkol 8: značení neuronových sekvencí s jazykovými vlastnostmi', 'et': 'DM_NLP SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 8: närvijada märgistamine keeleliste omadustega', 'fi': 'DM_NLP SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 8: neurosekvenssin merkitseminen kielellisillä ominaisuuksilla', 'az': 'DM_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 8: neural sequence labeling with linguistic features', 'ca': 'DM_NLP a SemEval-2018 tasca 8: etiquetar seqüència neuronal amb característiques lingüístices', 'sq': 'DM_NLP në SemEval-2018 Task 8: Sequence neural labeling with linguistic features', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'DM_NLP na SemEval-2018 Naloga 8: označevanje nevronskega zaporedja z jezikovnimi značilnostmi', 'he': 'DM_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 8: neural sequence labeling with linguistic features', 'jv': 'Developer', 'bo': 'DM_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 8: neural sequence labeling with linguistic features'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our submissions for SemEval-2018 Task 8 : Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using NLP. The DM_NLP participated in two subtasks : SubTask 1 classifies if a sentence is useful for inferring malware actions and capabilities, and SubTask 2 predicts token labels (Action, Entity, Modifier and Others) for a given malware-related sentence. Since we leverage results of Subtask 2 directly to infer the result of Subtask 1, the paper focus on the system solving Subtask 2. By taking Subtask 2 as a sequence labeling task, our system relies on a recurrent neural network named BiLSTM-CNN-CRF with rich linguistic features, such as POS tags, dependency parsing labels, chunking labels, NER labels, Brown clustering. Our system achieved the highest F1 score in both token level and phrase level.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة التقديمات التي قدمناها لـ SemEval-2018 Task 8: الاستخراج الدلالي من CybersecUrity REports باستخدام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. شارك DM_NLP في مهمتين فرعيتين: يصنف SubTask 1 ما إذا كانت الجملة مفيدة لاستنتاج إجراءات وقدرات البرامج الضارة ، ويتوقع SubTask 2 تسميات الرموز ("Action" و "Entity" و "Modifier" و "Other") لبرنامج ضار معين- الجملة ذات الصلة. نظرًا لأننا نستفيد من نتائج Subtask 2 مباشرةً لاستنتاج نتيجة Subtask 1 ، فإن الورق يركز على حل النظام Subtask 2. من خلال أخذ Subtask 2 كمهمة لوضع العلامات على التسلسل ، يعتمد نظامنا على شبكة عصبية متكررة تسمى BiLSTM-CNN-CRF مع ميزات لغوية غنية ، مثل علامات POS ، وتسميات تحليل التبعية ، وتسميات التقسيم ، وتسميات NER ، والتجميع البني. حقق نظامنا أعلى درجة F1 في كل من مستوى الرمز المميز ومستوى العبارة.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossos envios para a Tarefa 8 do SemEval-2018: extração semântica de relatórios de segurança cibernética usando NLP. O DM_NLP participou de duas subtarefas: a Subtarefa 1 classifica se uma sentença é útil para inferir ações e recursos de malware, e a Subtarefa 2 prevê rótulos de token (“Ação”, “Entidade”, “Modificador” e “Outros”) para um determinado malware. sentença relacionada. Como aproveitamos os resultados da Subtarefa 2 diretamente para inferir o resultado da Subtarefa 1, o artigo se concentra no sistema resolvendo a Subtarefa 2. Ao tomar a Subtarefa 2 como uma tarefa de rotulagem de sequência, nosso sistema depende de uma rede neural recorrente chamada BiLSTM-CNN-CRF com recursos linguísticos ricos, como tags POS, rótulos de análise de dependência, rótulos de agrupamento, rótulos NER, agrupamento Brown. Nosso sistema alcançou a maior pontuação na F1 tanto no nível de token quanto no nível de frase.', 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestros envíos para la Tarea 8 de SemeVal-2018: Extracción semántica de informes de ciberseguridad mediante PNL. La DM_NLP participó en dos subtareas: la SubTarea 1 clasifica si una oración es útil para inferir acciones y capacidades de malware, y la SubTarea 2 predice etiquetas de token («Acción», «Entidad», «Modificador» y «Otros») para una oración determinada relacionada con malware. Dado que aprovechamos los resultados de la subtarea 2 directamente para inferir el resultado de la subtarea 1, el documento se centra en el sistema que resuelve la subtarea 2. Al tomar la subtarea 2 como una tarea de etiquetado de secuencias, nuestro sistema se basa en una red neuronal recurrente llamada Bilstm-CNN-CRF con características lingüísticas ricas, como etiquetas POS, etiquetas de análisis de dependencias, etiquetas de fragmentación, etiquetas NER y agrupamiento marrón. Nuestro sistema logró la puntuación más alta de F1 tanto en el nivel de token como en el nivel de frase.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit nos soumissions pour SEMEval-2018 Task 8\xa0: Extraction sémantique à partir de rapports de cybersécurité à l'aide de la PNL. Le DM_NLP a participé à deux sous-tâches\xa0: la sous-tâche 1 classe si une phrase est utile pour déduire les actions et les capacités des programmes malveillants, et la sous-tâche 2 prédit les étiquettes de jetons («\xa0Action\xa0», «\xa0Entité\xa0», «\xa0Modificateur\xa0» et «\xa0Autres\xa0») pour une phrase liée au malware donnée. Puisque nous exploitons directement les résultats de la sous-tâche 2 pour déduire le résultat de la sous-tâche 1, le document se concentre sur le système qui résout la sous-tâche 2. En prenant la sous-tâche 2 comme tâche d'étiquetage de séquence, notre système s'appuie sur un réseau neuronal récurrent nommé Bilstm-CNN-CRF avec des fonctionnalités linguistiques riches, telles que des balises POS, des étiquettes d'analyse de dépendance, des étiquettes de segmentation, des étiquettes NER, des clusters Brown. Notre système a obtenu le score F1 le plus élevé au niveau du jeton et du niveau de phrase.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018タスク8 ： NLPを使用したCybersecUrity REportsからのセマンティック抽出のための提出物について説明します。DM_NLPは2つのサブタスクに参加しました。サブタスク1は、マルウェアのアクションと機能を推測するのに便利な文章かどうかを分類し、サブタスク2は、特定のマルウェア関連の文章のトークンラベル（「アクション」、「エンティティ」、「修飾子」、「その他」）を予測します。サブタスク2の結果を直接活用してサブタスク1の結果を推論しているため、サブタスク2を解くシステムに焦点を当てている。サブタスク2をシーケンス標識タスクとすることにより、当社のシステムは、POSタグ、依存性解析ラベル、チャンクラベル、NERラベル、ブラウンクラスタリングなどの豊富な言語機能を有するBiLSTM - CNN - CRFと名付けられた再発ニューラルネットワークに依存しています。当社のシステムは、トークンレベルとフレーズレベルの両方で最高のF 1スコアを達成しました。', 'zh': '本文引臣等为SemEval-2018任8提交之材:用NLP取语义于CybersecUrity REports。 DM_NLP预二子:SubTask 1 句有助于推恶意软件操作与功能分类,SubTask 2 占给定恶意软件句者令牌标("操作"、"实体"、"修饰符"、"他")。 以吾直用子2以1子职,故本文之重,系统决子2。 以子2为序,吾统赖于BiLSTM-CNN-CRF之递归神经网络,神经网络有丰言之征,如POS之标签,恃解析之标签,分块标签,NER标签,Brown聚类。 吾之统于令牌短语,皆极F1之数也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 कार्य 8 के लिए हमारी प्रस्तुतियों का वर्णन करता है: एनएलपी का उपयोग करके CybersecUrity REports से शब्दार्थ निष्कर्षण। DM_NLP ने दो उप-कार्यों में भाग लिया: SubTask 1 वर्गीकृत करता है कि क्या कोई वाक्य मैलवेयर कार्यों और क्षमताओं का अनुमान लगाने के लिए उपयोगी है, और SubTask 2 किसी दिए गए मैलवेयर से संबंधित वाक्य के लिए टोकन लेबल ("एक्शन", "एंटिटी", "मोडिफायर" और "अन्य") की भविष्यवाणी करता है। चूंकि हम सबटास्क 1 के परिणाम का अनुमान लगाने के लिए सीधे सबटास्क 2 के परिणामों का लाभ उठाते हैं, इसलिए पेपर सबटास्क 2 को हल करने वाली प्रणाली पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है। एक अनुक्रम लेबलिंग कार्य के रूप में Subtask 2 लेने से, हमारी प्रणाली अमीर भाषाई सुविधाओं के साथ BiLSTM-CNN-CRF नामक एक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क पर निर्भर करती है, जैसे कि POS टैग, निर्भरता पार्सिंग लेबल, चंकिंग लेबल, एनईआर लेबल, ब्राउन क्लस्टरिंग। हमारे सिस्टम ने टोकन स्तर और वाक्यांश स्तर दोनों में उच्चतम F1 स्कोर हासिल किया।', 'ru': 'Эта статья описывает наши представления для задачи 8 SemEval-2018: семантическое извлечение из CybersecUrity Reports с использованием NLP. DM_NLP участвовал в двух подзадачах: подзадача 1 классифицирует, полезно ли предложение для вывода действий и возможностей вредоносного ПО, а подзадача 2 предсказывает метки токенов («Действие», «Сущность», «Модификатор» и «Другие») для данного предложения, связанного с вредоносным ПО. Поскольку мы используем результаты Подзадачи 2 непосредственно для вывода результата Подзадачи 1, в статье основное внимание уделяется решению Подзадачи 2 системой. Принимая подзадачу 2 в качестве задачи маркировки последовательностей, наша система полагается на рекуррентную нейронную сеть под названием BiLSTM-CNN-CRF с богатыми лингвистическими характеристиками, такими как POS-метки, метки синтаксического анализа зависимостей, метки фрагментации, метки NER, кластеризация Брауна. Наша система достигла наивысшего балла F1 как на уровне токенов, так и на уровне фраз.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár n-aighneachtaí le haghaidh SemEval-2018 Tasc 8: Eastóscadh Séimeantach ó Thuarascálacha CyberseUrity ag baint úsáide as NLP. Ghlac an DM_NLP páirt in dhá fhothasc: Rangaíonn Fothasc 1 an bhfuil abairt úsáideach chun gníomhartha agus cumais malware a bhaint amach, agus déanann Fothasc 2 lipéid chomharthaí a thuar (“Gníomh”, “Eintiteas”, “Modhnaitheoir” agus “Eile”) le haghaidh malware ar leith- abairt gaolmhar. Ós rud é go ndéanaimid torthaí Fothasc 2 a ghiaráil go díreach chun toradh Fothasc 1 a bhaint astu, díríonn an páipéar ar réiteach an chórais Fothasc 2. Trí Fhothasc 2 a ghlacadh mar thasc lipéadaithe seicheamh, braitheann ár gcóras ar líonra néarach athfhillteach darb ainm BiLSTM-CNN-CRF. le gnéithe saibhir teanga, mar chlibeanna POS, lipéid pharsála spleáchais, lipéid smután, lipéid NER, cnuasú Donn. Bhain ár gcóras an scór F1 ab airde amach i leibhéal comharthaí agus frása.', 'ka': "ამ დოკუნტის გამოსახულება ჩვენი სამუშაო-2018 დავალებისთვის სამუშაო-2018 დავალებისთვის 8: სამუშაო სემონტიკური ექქსპორტი გამოყენებული NLP. DM_NLP იყო ორი საბეჭდომებში: SubTask 1 კლასიფიკაცია, თუ საბეჭდომა მუშაობელია მომხმარებელი მოქმედების და შესაძლებლობისთვის, და SubTask 2 წინასწარმოდგენა საბეჭდომები (მოქმედება', 'ელექტი', 'შეცვლელი' და 'სხვა') მი Subtask 2-ის წარმოდგენების შემდეგ, რომ Subtask 1-ის წარმოდგენების შემდეგ გავაკეთებთ, ასეულების ფონსკურება სისტემის გადაწყვეტა Subtask 2-ზე. Subtask 2 როგორც წერტილის საქაღალდე, ჩვენი სისტემა განხორციელი ნეიროლური ქსელზე გვერდება BiLSTM-CNN-CRF, როგორც დიდი ლენგური ფუნქციებით, როგორც POS- ჭდეები, დასაწყებელობის პარალიზაცია, წერტილის ჭდეები, NER ჭდეები,  ჩვენი სისტემა დავასრულეთ უფრო დიდი F1 წერტილი ორივე სისტემაში და ფრაზის დონეში.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 Task 8: Szemantikus kivonás a kiberbiztonsági újraportokból NLP segítségével. A DM_NLP két alcsoportban vett részt: az 1. alcsoport osztályozza, hogy egy mondat hasznos-e a rosszindulatú programok műveleteinek és képességeinek következtetésére, a 2. alcsoport pedig egy adott rosszindulatú programhoz kapcsolódó mondat tokencímkéit ("Action", "Entity", "Módosító" és "Egyéb"). Mivel a 2. subfeladat eredményeit közvetlenül kihasználjuk az 1. subfeladat eredményének következtetéséhez, a tanulmány a 2. subfeladat rendszer megoldására összpontosít. Azáltal, hogy a 2. subfeladatot sorozatcímkézési feladatként vesszük, rendszerünk egy BiLSTM-CNN-CRF nevű visszatérő neurális hálózatra támaszkodik, amely gazdag nyelvi tulajdonságokkal rendelkezik, mint például POS címkék, függőség elemzési címkék, daraboló címkék, NER címkék, barna fürtözés. Rendszerünk a legmagasabb F1 pontszámot érte el mind token szinten, mind kifejezési szinten.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τις αιτήσεις μας για την εργασία 8: Σημαντική εξαγωγή από επαναμεταφορές κυβερνοασφάλειας με χρήση NLP. Το συμμετείχε σε δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες: Η δευτερεύουσα εργασία 1 ταξινομεί εάν μια πρόταση είναι χρήσιμη για την εξαγωγή ενεργειών και δυνατοτήτων κακόβουλου λογισμικού και η δευτερεύουσα εργασία 2 προβλέπει ετικέτες συμβολαίων ("Δράση", "Οντότητα", "Τροποποιητής" και "Άλλοι") για μια δεδομένη πρόταση που σχετίζεται με κακόβουλο λογισμικό. Δεδομένου ότι αξιοποιούμε άμεσα τα αποτελέσματα της Υποεργασίας 2 για να συμπεράνουμε το αποτέλεσμα της Υποεργασίας 1, η εργασία επικεντρώνεται στο σύστημα επίλυσης της Υποεργασίας 2. Λαμβάνοντας την Υποεργασία 2 ως εργασία μαρκαρίσματος ακολουθίας, το σύστημά μας βασίζεται σε ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο με πλούσια γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά, όπως ετικέτες ανάλυσης εξαρτήσεων, ετικέτες κομματισμού, ετικέτες ΝΕΡ, ομαδοποίηση καφέ. Το σύστημά μας πέτυχε την υψηλότερη βαθμολογία τόσο σε επίπεδο συμβολαίων όσο και σε επίπεδο φράσεων.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive i nostri contributi per SemEval-2018 Task 8: Estrazione semantica da Cybersecurity REports utilizzando NLP. DM_NLP ha partecipato a due sottoattività: SubTask 1 classifica se una frase è utile per dedurre azioni e capacità malware, e SubTask 2 predice etichette di token ('Azione', 'Entità', 'Modificatore' e 'Altri') per una data frase relativa al malware. Poiché sfruttiamo i risultati di Subtask 2 direttamente per dedurre il risultato di Subtask 1, il documento si concentra sulla soluzione del sistema Subtask 2. Prendendo Subtask 2 come attività di etichettatura di sequenza, il nostro sistema si basa su una rete neurale ricorrente chiamata BiLSTM-CNN-CRF con ricche caratteristiche linguistiche, come tag POS, etichette di analisi delle dipendenze, etichette di chunking, etichette NER, clustering marrone. Il nostro sistema ha ottenuto il punteggio F1 più alto sia a livello token che a livello di frase.", 'kk': "Бұл қағаз біздің SemEval-2018 тапсырмасының 8- тапсырмасының жіберімізді таңдайды: NLP қолданып CybersecUrity репорттарынан Semantic Extraction. DM_ NLP екі ішкі сұраныста қатысулы: SubTask 1 классификациясы, егер бұл сұраныс жағдай әрекеттерін және мүмкіндіктерді бақылау үшін пайдалы болса, және SubTask 2 тапсырмасы таңбалау жарлықтарын ('Әрекет', 'Бөлім', 'Өзгерту' және 'Басқа Біз 2- тапсырманың нәтижесін 1- тапсырманың нәтижесін тәсілдіру үшін, 2- тапсырманың жүйелерді шешу жүйесіне назар ауыстырылады. Subtask 2 реттік жарлық тапсырмасы ретінде қолданып, біздің жүйеміз BiLSTM-CNN-CRF деп аталатын неврал желіне тәуелді, POS тегтері, тәуелдік талдау жарлықтары, тәуелдік жарлықтары, NER жарлықтары, Brown кластерингі деп аталады. Біздің жүйеміз белгілер деңгейінде және сөздер деңгейінде ең жоғары деңгейіне жетті.", 'mk': "Овој весник ги опишува нашите поднесувања за SemEval-2018 задача 8: Семантична екстракција од CybersecUrity REports користејќи NLP. DM_NLP учествуваше во две потпрашања: SubTask 1 класификува дали реченицата е корисна за инферирање на дејствата и способностите на злоупотреба, а SubTask 2 предвидува ознаки ('Action', 'Entity', 'Modifier' и 'Others') за одредена реченица поврзана со злоупотреба. Бидејќи ги искористуваме резултатите на подзадачата 2 директно за да го заклучиме резултатот на подзадачата 1, хартијата се фокусира на системот за решавање на подзадачата 2. Со преземањето на подзадачата 2 како задача за означување на секвенца, нашиот систем се потпира на рецидентна нервна мрежа наречена BiLSTM-CNN-CRF со богати јазични карактеристики, како што се POS означувања, анализирање на зависноста, парчиња означувања, NER означувања, Brown clustering. Нашиот систем го постигна највисокиот резултат F1 на нивото на знаци и на нивото на фрази.", 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan penghantaran kami untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Ekstraksi Semantik dari laporan CybersecUrity menggunakan NLP. DM_NLP berpartisipasi dalam dua sub-tanya: SubTask 1 mengklasifikasikan jika kalimat berguna untuk menyimpulkan tindakan dan kemampuan malware, dan SubTask 2 meramalkan label token ('Action', 'Entity', 'Modifier' and 'Others') untuk kalimat berkaitan malware yang diberi. Oleh kerana kita menggunakan keputusan Subtugas 2 secara langsung untuk menyimpulkan keputusan Subtugas 1, fokus kertas pada penyelesaian sistem Subtugas 2. Dengan mengambil Subtugas 2 sebagai tugas mengetikkan jujukan, sistem kami bergantung pada rangkaian saraf berkurang bernama BiLSTM-CNN-CRF dengan ciri-ciri bahasa yang kaya, seperti tag POS, label penghuraian dependensi, label potongan, label NER, kelompok coklat. Sistem kami mencapai skor F1 tertinggi dalam aras token dan aras frasa.", 'mn': "Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2018 Task 8-ийн төлөөлөгдлийг тайлбарладаг: NLP ашиглаж CybersecUrity REports-ээс Semantic Extraction. Дэмб_NLP хоёр суутаслагуудад оролцсон: SubTask 1-ийн хувьд өгүүлбэр зөвхөн хөгжлийн үйл ажиллагаа, боломжуудыг багасгах хэрэгтэй бөгөөд SubTask 2-ийн хувьд тодорхойлолтын жагсаалт ('Action', 'Entity', 'Modifier' болон 'Other') гэсэн зөвхөн өгүүлбэр хэрэг Бид Subtask 2-ийн үр дүнг шууд Subtask 1-ийн үр дүнг цогцуулахын тулд ашиглаж байгаа учраас цаас 2-ын суб-даалгаварыг шийдэх системд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Subtask 2-г дарааллын маркингийн үйл ажиллагаар бидний систем BiLSTM-CNN-CRF гэдэг баян хэлний чадвартай дахин давтагдсан мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд хамаарч байна. Жишээ нь POS-тегт, хамааралтай талдаа маркинг, chunking labels, NER-тегт, Браун кластеринг. Бидний систем тодорхойлолтын түвшинд болон үгийн түвшинд хамгийн өндөр тоог олсон.", 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver våre søknader for semiEval-2018 Oppgåve 8: Semantisk utpakking frå CybersecUrity REporter med NLP. DM_NLP delta i to underspørsmål: SubTask 1 klassifiserer dersom ein setning er nyttig for å sletta malvare- handlingar og kapasiteten, og SubTask 2 foregår merkelapper (« Handling », « Entity », « Modifier » og « Andre ») for ein gitt malvare- relatert setning. Sidan vi leverer resultatet av Subtask 2 direkte for å gjere resultatet av Subtask 1, fokuserer papiret på systemløysing av Subtask 2. Ved å ta Subtask 2 som ei sekvensmerkelapp oppgåve, er systemet vårt avhengig av eit rekurserande neuralnettverk kalla BiLSTM-CNN-CRF med rike lingviske funksjonar, slik som POS-merker, avhengighetstolkingslag, avhengighetsmerkelapp, NER-merkelapp, Brown clustering. Sistemet vårt oppnådd den høgste F1- poeng i både teiknenivå og fråsnivå.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 8 ന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു ഡിഎ_ എംഎല്\u200dപി രണ്ടു സബ്ജോട്ടുകളില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നു: തെറ്റുവെയര്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളെയും കഴിവുകളെയും പീഡിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു വാക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ഉപയോഗി സുബ്ബട്ട് 1-ന്റെ ഫലത്തിന് നേരിട്ട് നേരിട്ട് സുബ്ബട്ട് 2-ന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കുറവാക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d  സുബ്ബട്ട് 2 ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റം- സിന്\u200dഎംഎംഎംസ്-സിന്\u200d- സിഎംഎംസ് എന്\u200dഎം എന്ന പേരുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d നെറ്റാള്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d ഏറ്റവും ഉയര്\u200dന്ന സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തിച്ചെടുത്തു.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasze zgłoszenia dotyczące SemEval-2018 Task 8: Ekstrakcja semantyczna z cyberbezpieczeństwa REportów przy użyciu NLP. DM_NLP uczestniczył w dwóch podzadaniach: SubTask 1 klasyfikuje, czy zdanie jest przydatne do wnioskowania działań i możliwości złośliwego oprogramowania, a SubTask 2 przewiduje etykiety tokenów ("Akcja", "Entita", "Modyfikator" i "Inne") dla danego zdania związanego ze złośliwym oprogramowaniem. Ponieważ wykorzystujemy wyniki podzadania 2 bezpośrednio do wnioskowania wyniku podzadania 1, artykuł skupia się na systemie rozwiązywania podzadania 2. Przyjmując Subtask 2 jako zadanie etykietowania sekwencji, nasz system opiera się na powtarzającej się sieci neuronowej o nazwie BiLSTM-CNN-CRF z bogatymi funkcjami językowymi, takimi jak tagi POS, etykiety parsowania zależności, etykiety grupowania, etykiety NER, klastrowanie brązowe. Nasz system osiągnął najwyższy wynik F1 zarówno na poziomie tokenów, jak i fraz.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie propunerile noastre pentru SemEval-2018 Task 8: Extracție semantică din Cybersecurity REports folosind PNL. DM_NLP a participat la două subactivități: SubTask 1 clasifică dacă o propoziție este utilă pentru deducerea acțiunilor și capacităților malware, iar SubTask 2 prezice etichetele de token ("Acțiune", "Entitate", "Modificator" și "Alții") pentru o anumită propoziție legată de malware. Deoarece folosim rezultatele Subtask 2 direct pentru a deduce rezultatul Subtask 1, lucrarea se concentrează pe rezolvarea sistemului Subtask 2. Prin luarea Subtask 2 ca o sarcină de etichetare a secvențelor, sistemul nostru se bazează pe o rețea neurală recurentă numită BiLSTM-CNN-CRF cu caracteristici lingvistice bogate, cum ar fi etichetele POS, etichetele de analizare a dependențelor, etichetele de chunking, etichetele NER, clustering maro. Sistemul nostru a obținut cel mai mare scor F1 atât la nivel de token, cât și la nivel de fraze.', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjonijiet tagħna għal SemEval-2018 Kompitu 8: Estrazzjoni Semantika mir-Rapporti taċ-Ċibersurjetà bl-użu tal-NLP. Id-DM_NLP ipparteċipa f'żewġ sottomistoqsijiet: is-SubTask 1 tikklassifika jekk sentenza hijiex utli biex jiġu inferiti azzjonijiet u kapaċitajiet ta' malware, u s-SubTask 2 tipprevedi tikketti ta' tokens ('Azzjoni', 'Entità', 'Modifikatur' u 'Oħrajn') għal sentenza partikolari relatata ma' malware. Peress li nagħmlu ingranaġġ dirett għar-riżultati tas-Subkompitu 2 biex jiġi konkluż ir-riżultat tas-Subkompitu 1, il-karta tiffoka fuq is-Soluzzjoni tas-Sistema tas-Subkompitu 2. Billi tieħu s-Subkompitu 2 bħala kompitu ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza, is-sistema tagħna tiddependi fuq netwerk newrali rikorrenti msejjaħ BiLSTM-CNN-CRF b’karatteristiċi lingwistiċi rikki, bħal tikketti POS, tikketti tal-analiżi tad-dipendenza, tikketti tal-qsim, tikketti NER, raggruppament kannella. Is-sistema tagħna kisbet l-ogħla punteġġ F1 kemm fil-livell tat-token kif ukoll fil-livell tal-frażi.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinami mūsų pasiūlymai dėl 8 užduoties „Semantinis ekstrahavimas iš kibernetinio šlapinimosi pranešimų, naudojant NLP“. DM_NLP dalyvavo dviejuose paklausimuose: 1 paklausimas klasifikuoja, ar sakinys yra naudingas klaidingos įrangos veiksmams ir pajėgumams nustatyti, o 2 paklausa numato ženklų etiketes („veiksmas“, „subjektas“, „modifikatorius“ ir „kiti“) konkrečiam su klaidinga įranga susijusiam sakiniui. Kadangi tiesiogiai panaudojame 2 papunkčio rezultatus, kad būtų galima daryti išvadą dėl 1 papunkčio, dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriama 2 papunkčio sistemos sprendimui. Įvertindama 2-ąją pakopos užduotį kaip sekos ženklinimo užduotį, mūsų sistema remiasi pasikartojančiu nerviniu tinklu, vadinamu BiLSTM-CNN-CRF, turinčiu daug kalbinių savybių, pavyzdžiui, POS žymenų, priklausomybės analizavimo žymenų, gabalų žymenų, NER žymenų, rudo klasterizavimo. Mūsų sistema pasiekė didžiausią F1 rezultatą tiek simbolių lygiu, tiek frazės lygiu.', 'so': "Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran warqaddayada loo soo diro SemEval-2018 shaqo 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using NLP. DM_NLP wuxuu ka qayb galay laba maamul ah: Shaqo 1 fasax haddii uu eray uu faa’iido u yahay in uu ka dhufto falimaha iyo awoodda lambarka, iyo suurtagalka 2 wuxuu ka sii sheegaa calaamada calaamada ('Action', 'Entity', 'Guherka' iyo qaarka kale') oo uu ku qoray ciqaab la xiriira malware. Since we leverage results of Subtask 2 directly to infer the result of Subtask 1, the paper focus on the system solving Subtask 2.  Usoo qaadashada Subtask 2 sida shaqada sequence labeling, systemkeenu wuxuu ku xiran yahay shabakadda neural ee soo socda ee la magacaabay BiLSTM-CNN-CRF with rich luqadaha, tusaale ahaan POS tags, dependency parsing labels, chunking labels, NER labels, Brown clustering. Systemkanagu wuxuu gaadhay heerka ugu sarreeya F1 heerka calaamada iyo heerka afka.", 'sr': "Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke za zadatak 8 od semiEval-2018: Semantička izvlačenja iz Sajber-sigurnosti izveštaja sa NLP-om. DM_NLP je sudjelovao u dva podupisa: SubTask 1 klasifikuje ako je rečenica korisna za uvođenje malware akcija i mogućnosti, a SubTask 2 predviđa značke etikete ('Akcija', 'Entity', 'Modifikator' i 'drugi') za određenu rečenicu vezanu za malware. Budući da upotrebimo rezultate podzadataka 2 direktno da bi zaradili rezultat podzadataka 1, papir se fokusirao na rešavanje sustava podzadataka 2. Uzeći Subtask 2 kao posao označavanja sekvence, naš sistem se oslanja na rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu po imenu BiLSTM-CNN-CRF sa bogatim lingvističkim karakteristikama, kao što su POS znakovi, etikete za analizu zavisnosti, etikete za delivanje, etikete NER-a, brojni skustering. Naš sistem je postigao najviši rezultat F1 na nivou znakova i fraze.", 'sv': "Denna uppsats beskriver våra bidrag för SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using NLP. DM_NLP deltog i två underaktiviteter: SubTask 1 klassificerar om en mening är användbar för att härleda malware-åtgärder och -funktioner, och SubTask 2 förutspår token-etiketter ('Åtgärd', 'Entity', 'Modifier' och 'Other') för en given malware-relaterad mening. Eftersom vi utnyttjar resultaten av Subtask 2 direkt för att härleda resultatet av Subtask 1 fokuserar uppsatsen på systemlösningen Subtask 2. Genom att ta Subtask 2 som en sekvensmärkningsuppgift förlitar vårt system sig på ett återkommande neuralt nätverk som heter BiLSTM-CNN-CRF med rika språkliga funktioner, såsom POS-taggar, beroendetolkningsetiketter, chunking etiketter, NER etiketter, Brown clustering. Vårt system uppnådde den högsta F1-poängen i både token- och frasnivå.", 'ta': "இந்த தாள் செம்Eval- 2018 பணிக்கான எங்கள் கூற்றுக்களை விவரிக்கிறது: சைப்பர் secrecy REports using NLP யில் இருந்து Semantic Extraction. DM_ NLP இரண்டு துணை பணிகளில் பங்கிடப்பட்டது: கொடுக்கப்பட்ட தவறு செயல்கள் மற்றும் துறைகளை பிரித்து ஒரு வாக்கு பயனுள்ளதாக இருந்தால், மற்றும் துணை பணி 2 குறியீட்டு குறியீடுகள் ('Action', 'Entity', 'ம உப செயல் 1 முடிவை குறைக்க நேரடியாக துணை செய்யும் முடிவுகளின் விளைவுகளை நாங்கள் இருந்தால், துணை பணி 2 தீர்க்கும துணை பணி 2 என்று எடுத்துக் கொண்டு, எங்கள் கணினியின் மீண்டும் நிகழ்ந்த புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் சார்ந்து இருக்கும் பில்ஸ்டாம்- CNN- CRF என்ற பெயர் பணக் கூடிய மொழியில் குணங்கள் உள்ளது, POS க எங்கள் அமைப்பு அதிக F1 மதிப்பெண்ணை அடைந்தது குறியீட்டு மட்டத்திலும் சொற்றொடர் நிலையிலும்.", 'ur': "This paper describes our submissions for SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using NLP. The DM_NLP participated in two subtasks: SubTask 1 classifies if a sentence is useful for inferring malware actions and capabilities, and SubTask 2 predicts token labels ('Action', 'Entity', 'Modifier' and 'others') for a given malware-related sentence. ہم Subtask 2 کے نتائج کو مستقیماً سٹوٹک 1 کے نتائج کے ذریعہ دکھانے کے لئے لکھتے ہیں، کاغذ سوٹوٹک 2 کے حل کرنے کے لئے سیسٹم پر تمرکز کرتا ہے. Subtask 2 کو ایک سطح لابلینگ ٹاکس بنا کر، ہماری سیسٹم ایک دوبارہ نائرل نیٹورک پر بیLSTM-CNN-CRF کے نام سے روک رہی ہے، جیسے POS ٹاگ، نائبطہ پارسینگ لابل، چانکینگ لابل، NER لابل، براون کلاسترینگ کے ساتھ۔ ہماری سیستم نے ٹوکین سطح اور فریز سطح میں سب سے زیادہ بالاترین F1 اسکو پہنچا۔", 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සෙම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 8 ගැන සෙම්වැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරවේශනය විස්තර කරනවා: සායිබර්ස්කුරිටි ප්\u200dරවේශනය NLP භාවිත The DEM_NLP partied in both subtask: SubJob 1 classifies if a word is Used for Infrring malware action and captivities, and SubJob 2 forecast Token Labels ('Action', 'Unitity', 'Modifier' and 'Others') for a set of malware-linked Words. අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර 2 වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර පද්ධතිය Sub-job 2 as a sequence Labling job, our system is on a recreative neural network name BiLSTM-CNN-CRF with rich language istic Featuring, e.g. POS Tags, Dependency Parsing Labels, Chunking Labels, NER Labels, Brown cluster ing. අපේ පද්ධතියේ F1 ස්කෝර් එක්ක උපස්ථ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණ ස්ථානයේ තොක්කෝන් ස්ථානයෙන් ඉ", 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval-2018 Vazifa 8: Cybersecurity REportdan Semantic Extraction REports using NLP. Name Biz Subtask 1 natijasini ko'rib chiqish uchun tub vazifasi 2 natijalarini yetarmoqchimiz sababchi bo'lsangiz, tub vazifa 2 tugmasini tizimga fokuslash mumkin. Name Bizning tizimimizning eng eng yuqori F1 scori teg darajada va imkoniyat darajada yetdi.", 'vi': "Bài viết này mô tả những góp ý của chúng ta cho nhiệm vụ SemEvol-2008: chiết xuất Semantic từ Cyber-Urty REP. The DM Nchọc đã tham dự hai phụ đề: SubTask 1 phân loại nếu một câu có ích cho việc nhận ra khả năng và hành động độc mã, và SubTask 2 dự đoán các nhãn biểu tượng (Hành động, Thực đơn, sửa đổi'và'Những người khác') cho một câu có liên quan tới virus. Vì chúng ta sử dụng kết quả của giấu giếm 2 để kết quả của giấu giếm 1, các báo cáo tập trung vào phân giải hệ thống giấu giếm 2. Dùng chúng để phân tích mã số 2, hệ thống của chúng ta phụ thuộc vào một mạng thần kinh liên tục có tên BiLSTM-CNN-CRF với các yếu tố ngôn ngữ giàu có như thẻ POS, lạm dụng các nhãn phân tách phụ thuộc, nhãn khoanh vùng, cái nhãn nằm dưới, kỳ cục Brown. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đạt được điểm F1 cao nhất trong cả trình độ tượng trưng và cụm từ.", 'hr': "Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke za zadatak 8. polovičnog ispitivanja: Semantička izvlačenja iz izvlačenja kibersekUriteta koristeći NLP. DM_NLP je sudjelovao u dvije podupire: SubTask 1 klasifikira se ako je rečenica korisna za infekciju djela i mogućnosti malware a, a SubTask 2 predviđa značke etikete ('Akcija', 'Entity', 'Modifikator' i 'Drugi') za određenu rečenicu vezanu za malwarea. Budući da smo upotrijebili rezultate podzadataka 2 direktno kako bi doveli do rezultata podzadataka 1, papir se fokusirao na sustav rješavanja podzadataka 2. Uzimajući Subtask 2 kao posao označavanja sekvence, naš sustav se oslanja na rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu po imenu BiLSTM-CNN-CRF sa bogatim jezičkim karakteristikama, poput POS znakova, označavanja zavisnosti, označavanja dijelova, označavanja NER-a, Brown skustering. Naš sustav je postigao najviši rezultat F1 na razini znakova i fraze.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашите предложения за задача 8: Семантично извличане от киберсекурити, използвайки НЛП. DM_NLP участва в две подзадачи: Подзадача 1 класифицира дали изречение е полезно за извеждане на действия и възможности на зловреден софтуер, а Подзадача 2 прогнозира етикети на символи ("Действие", "Същество", "Модификатор" и "Други") за дадено изречение, свързано с зловреден софтуер. Тъй като използваме резултатите от Подзадача 2 директно, за да извлечем резултата от Подзадача 1, статията се фокусира върху решаването на системата Подзадача 2. Приемайки Подзадача 2 като задача за етикетиране на последователност, нашата система разчита на повтаряща се невронна мрежа с богати лингвистични характеристики, като етикети за анализ на зависимостта, етикети за грубване, етикети за кафяво клъстериране. Нашата система постигна най-висок резултат както на ниво символ, така и на ниво фраза.', 'de': "Diese Arbeit beschreibt unsere Beiträge für SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using NLP. Der DM_NLP nahm an zwei Teilaufgaben teil: SubTask 1 klassifiziert, ob ein Satz nützlich ist, um Malware-Aktionen und -Fähigkeiten abzuleiten, und SubTask 2 prognostiziert Token-Labels ('Action', 'Entity', 'Modifier' und 'Others') für einen bestimmten Satz im Zusammenhang mit Malware. Da wir die Ergebnisse von Subtask 2 direkt nutzen, um das Ergebnis von Subtask 1 abzuleiten, konzentriert sich das Papier auf die Systemlösung von Subtask 2. Durch die Verwendung von Subtask 2 als Sequenz-Etikettierungsaufgabe stützt sich unser System auf ein wiederkehrendes neuronales Netzwerk namens BiLSTM-CNN-CRF mit umfangreichen linguistischen Funktionen, wie POS-Tags, Abhängigkeits-Parsing-Labels, Chunking-Labels, NER-Labels, Brown Clustering. Unser System erzielte die höchste F1-Punktzahl sowohl im Token-Level als auch im Phrase-Level.", 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver vores indlæg til SemEval-2018 Opgave 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using NLP. DM_NLP deltog i to underopgaver: SubTask 1 klassificerer, om en sætning er nyttig til at udlede malware-handlinger og -funktioner, og SubTask 2 forudsiger token-etiketter ('Handling', 'Entity', 'Modifier' og 'Andre') for en given malware-relateret sætning. Da vi udnytter resultaterne af Subopgave 2 direkte til at udlede resultatet af Subopgave 1, fokuserer papiret på systemløsningen Subopgave 2. Ved at tage Subtask 2 som en sekvensmærkningsopgave er vores system afhængig af et tilbagevendende neuralt netværk ved navn BiLSTM-CNN-CRF med rige sproglige funktioner, såsom POS-tags, afhængighedsparsing etiketter, chunking etiketter, NER etiketter, Brown clustering. Vores system opnåede den højeste F1 score i både token niveau og sætning niveau.", 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft onze inzendingen voor SemEval-2018 Taak 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports with NLP. De DM_NLP nam deel aan twee subtaken: SubTask 1 classificeert of een zin nuttig is voor het afleiden van malware-acties en -mogelijkheden, en SubTask 2 voorspelt tokenlabels ('Actie', 'Entiteit', 'Modifier' en 'Anderen') voor een bepaalde malware-gerelateerde zin. Aangezien we de resultaten van Subtaak 2 rechtstreeks gebruiken om het resultaat van Subtaak 1 te concluderen, concentreert de paper zich op het systeem dat Subtaak 2 oplost. Door Subtask 2 als een sequentie labeling taak te nemen, vertrouwt ons systeem op een terugkerend neuraal netwerk genaamd BiLSTM-CNN-CRF met rijke linguïstische functies, zoals POS tags, afhankelijkheidsparsing labels, chunking labels, NER labels, Brown clustering. Ons systeem behaalde de hoogste F1 score in zowel token level als phrase level.", 'ko': "본고는 우리가 제출한SemEval-18 임무 8: NLP를 사용하여 네트워크 안전 보고서에서 의미를 추출한다.DM NLP는 두 개의 하위 임무에 참여했다. 하위 임무1은 한 문장을 분류하는 것이 악성 소프트웨어의 행위와 기능을 추정하는 데 도움이 되는지, 하위 임무2는 악성 소프트웨어와 관련된 문장에 대한 태그 라벨('동작','실체','수식어'와'기타'를 예측한다.우리는 하위 임무 2의 결과를 직접 이용하여 하위 임무 1의 결과를 추정하기 때문에 본고는 체계적으로 하위 임무 2를 구하는 데 중점을 둘 것이다.서브퀘스트 2를 서열 표기 퀘스트로 함으로써 우리 시스템은 BilSTM CNN CRF라는 귀속 신경 네트워크에 의존한다. 이 네트워크는 단어성 표기, 의존성 분석 표기, 블록 표기, NER 표기, Brown 클래스 등 다양한 언어 특징을 가지고 있다.우리 시스템은 태그 레벨과 짧은 언어 레벨에서 가장 높은 F1 점수를 받았다.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ تحویل\u200cهای ما را برای تابع ۱۸ سال ۲۰۱۸ توصیف می\u200cکند: اخراج سیمانتیک از پایگاه\u200cهای سایبرسکوریت استفاده از NLP. DM_NLP در دو subtasks شرکت کرد: SubTask 1 کلی می\u200cکند اگر یک جمله برای تحریک کردن فعالیت و توانایی\u200cهای malware مفید باشد، و SubTask 2 برای یک جمله مربوط به malware پیش بینی می\u200cکند. از آنجایی که نتایج زیر کار ۲ را مستقیما برای تأثیر نتیجه زیر کار ۱ تأثیر می دهیم، کاغذ روی سیستم حل زیر کار ۲ تمرکز می کند. با استفاده از Subtask 2 به عنوان یک کار برچسب برچسب برچسب، سیستم ما بر یک شبکه عصبی دوباره به نام BiLSTM-CNN-CRF بستگی دارد با ویژگی های زبان\u200cشناسی ثروتمند، مانند برچسب POS، برچسب\u200cهای برچسب بستگی، برچسب\u200cهای برچسب، برچسب\u200cهای NER، کلاسترینگ براون. سیستم ما بالاترین امتیاز F1 را در سطح علامت و عبارت رسید.', 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan pengiriman kami untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Ekstraksi Semantik dari laporan CybersecUrity menggunakan NLP. DM_NLP berpartisipasi dalam dua subtasks: SubTask 1 mengklasifikasikan apakah kalimat berguna untuk menyimpulkan aksi dan kemampuan malware, dan SubTask 2 memprediksi label token ('Action', 'Entity', 'Modifier' dan 'Others') untuk kalimat yang terkait malware tertentu. Since we leverage results of Subtask 2 directly to infer the result of Subtask 1, the paper focus on the system solving Subtask 2.  Dengan mengambil Subtask 2 sebagai tugas penulisan urutan, sistem kami bergantung pada jaringan saraf berkurang bernama BiLSTM-CNN-CRF dengan ciri-ciri bahasa yang kaya, seperti tag POS, label penghuraian dependensi, bit label, label NER, clustering coklat. Sistem kita mencapai skor F1 tertinggi di tingkat token dan tingkat frasa.", 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaelezea maandishi yetu kwa ajili ya SemEval-2018 kazi 8: Utoa wa kimapenzi kutoka kwenye tovuti ya Usafiri kwa kutumia NLP. DM_NLP ilishiriki katika majukumu mawili: Mipango ya Kazi 1 kama hukumu itakuwa na manufaa kwa kusababisha vitendo na uwezo na vifaa vya vifaa vya vifaa vya vifaa, na kazi 2 inatabiri alama za alama ('Action', 'Entertainment', 'Modifier' na 'Wengine') kwa hukumu inayohusiana na vifaa vya vibaya. Tangu tunavyotumia matokeo ya Ujumbe wa 2 moja kwa moja ili kupunguza matokeo ya Ujumbe wa 1, gazeti linalenga kwenye mfumo wa kutatua ujumbe wa 2. Kwa kuchukua ujumbe wa Ujumbe wa 2 kama jukumu la mfululizo, mfumo wetu unategemea mtandao wa neura unaoendelea jina la BiLSTM-CNN-CRF kwa utaalamu wa lugha zenye utajiri wa lugha, kama vile alama za POS, kutegemea mabango ya kuchimba, kufungia mabango, mabango ya NER, yenye uchunguzi wa lugha ya Brown. Mfumo wetu ulipata vipimo vya juu vya F1 katika ngazi za alama na msemo.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval-2018 Görevi 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using NLP. DM Subtask 2 netijesini çykarmak üçin elimizden soňra Subtask 1-iň netijesini çykarmak üçin, kagyz sistemiň 2-nji işi çözmesine fokus edýär. Subtask 2'i bir düzgün etiketleme täblisasynda, biziň sistemimiz BiLSTM-CNN-CRF adynda ýene-täzelikli netwärler bilen güýçli, POS tägleri, bağlılıklyk etiketleri, chunking etiketlere, NER etiketlere, Brown klustering diýip atlandyrylýar. Biziň sistemimiz token we fraz derejesinde iň üst depesini ýetdi.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons onderwyselings vir SemEval-2018 Taak 8: Semantiese uitpakking van CybersecUrity Verports gebruik NLP. Die DM_NLP het in twee subtaske gedeel: SubTask 1 klassifiseer as 'n seting is nuttig vir die verwyder van malware aksies en kapasiteite, en SubTask 2 voorskou teken etikette ('Aksie', 'Eenheid', 'Verander' en 'ander') vir 'n gegewe malware-verwante seting. Omdat ons die resultate van Subtaak 2 direk verwyder om die resultaat van Subtaak 1 te verwyder, die papier fokus op die stelsel oplos Subtaak 2. Deur Subtaak 2 as 'n volgorde etiket opdrag te neem, ons stelsel verlig op 'n herhaalde neuralnetwerk genaamd BiLSTM-CNN-CRF met ryk lingwisiese funksies, soos POS etikette, afhanklikheid verwerking etikette, blokking etikette, NER etikette, Brown clustering. Ons stelsel het die hoogste F1 punt bereik in beide token vlak en frase vlak.", 'sq': "Ky dokument përshkruan paraqitjet tona për SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using NLP. DM_NLP mori pjesë në dy nënpyetje: SubTask 1 klasifikon nëse një fjalim është i dobishëm për të përfshirë veprimet dhe aftësitë e malware dhe SubTask 2 parashikon etiketa token ('Veprim', 'Entitet', 'Modifier' dhe 'Others') për një fjalim të caktuar lidhur me malware. Që kur nxjerrim rezultatet e Subtask 2 drejtpërdrejt për të përfshirë rezultatin e Subtask 1, letra përqëndrohet në zgjidhjen e sistemit Subtask 2. Duke marrë Subtask 2 si një detyrë të etiketuar sekuencë, sistemi ynë mbështetet në një rrjet neural të përsëritur të quajtur BiLSTM-CNN-CRF me karakteristika të pasura gjuhësore, të tilla si etiketa POS, etiketa analizimi i varësisë, etiketa copëzimi, etiketa NER, grupimi Brown. Sistemi ynë arriti rezultatin më të lartë F1 në nivelin e token dhe në nivelin e frazës.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ներկայացումները "Սեմենտիկ վերացումը" 2018-ի "Սեմենտիկ վերացումը" 8-ի "Սեմենտիկ վերացումը" DM_NSP-ը մասնակցել է երկու ենթահարցերում. ենթախնդիր 1-ը դասակարգում է, թե արդյոք նախադասությունը օգտակար է սխալ ծրագրերի գործողությունների և հնարավորությունների հետևելու համար, իսկ ենթախնդիր 2-ը կանխատեսում է նշանների պիտակներ (\'Action\', \'ENTITY\', \'modiFIER\' և \'Ինչյուր\') որոշ նախադասություն Քանի որ մենք օգտագործում ենք 2-ի ենթախնդրի արդյունքները ուղղակիորեն ենթախնդրի 1-ի արդյունքի եզրակացության համար, թղթին կենտրոնանում է 2-ի ենթախնդրի լուծման համակարգի վրա: Օգտագործելով ենթախնդիր 2-ը որպես հաջորդականության պիտակ, մեր համակարգը հիմնված է կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի վրա, որը կոչվում է Բիլսթմ-ՍՆՆ-ԿՌՖ, և որը ունի հարուստ լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են POS թեգերը, կախվածության վերլուծություն պիտակները, կտորների պի Մեր համակարգը հասավ F1-ի ամենաբարձր գնահատականի՝ երկուսի և արտահայտության մակարդակում:', 'am': "ይህ ገጽ ለሴmEval-2018 ስራ 8: ከCybersecurity REports using NLP የሴማኒክ ውጭ የሚያሳውቃለን፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s መሠረት 1 ከማሳወስ ጀምሮ የSubtask 2 ፍሬዎችን አቅራቢያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ደብዳቤ 2 በመስጠት የስራ ማድረግ፣ ስርዓታችን ቢLSTM-CNN-CRF በሚባል በሀብታም ቋንቋዊ ምርጫዎች፣ እንደ POS ምልክቶች፣ የመታሰቢያ ማኅበረሰብ፣ ምልክቶች፣ ምልክቶች፣ የNER ምልክቶች፣ Brown clustering. Our system achieved the highest F1 score in both token level and phrase level.", 'az': "Bu kağıt, NLP vasitəsilə CybersecUrity REportlarından Semantic Extraction'larımızı yarışır. DM_NLP iki subtaskada iştirak etdi: SubTask 1 klasifiki, əgər bir cümlənin malware işləri və qabiliyyətləri indirmək üçün faydalı olursa, və SubTask 2 belə yazılmış malware işləri üçün token etiketlərini ('Eylem', 'Entity', 'Modifier' və 'Digər') təmin edir. Subtask 2 sonuçlarını doğrudan Subtask 1 sonuçlarını çəkmək üçün istifadə etdiyimiz səhifə 2-ni çəkən Subtask 2 sisteminə odaqlanır. Subtask 2'i seçmə etiketləmə görevi olaraq sistemimiz BiLSTM-CNN-CRF adlı yenidən nöral şəbəkəyə təvəkkül edir, POS etiketləri, bağımlılıq ayırma etiketləri, chunking etiketləri, NER etiketləri, Brown klusterinə bənzəyir. Sistemimiz hər ikisi də token səviyyəsində və fraz səviyyəsində ən yüksək F1 nöqtəsinə nail oldu.", 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke za zadatak 8. polu-Eval-2018: Semantička izvlačenja iz izvlačenja CybersecUrity izveštaja koristeći NLP. DM_NLP je sudjelovao u dvije podaske: SubTask 1 klasifikuje ako je rečenica korisna za inficiranje akcija i mogućnosti malvera, a SubTask 2 predviđa značke etikete ('Akcija', 'Entity', 'Modifikator' i 'drugi') za određenu rečenicu vezanu za malvera. Budući da upotrebimo rezultate podzadataka 2 direktno da bi zaradili rezultat podzadataka 1, papir se fokusirao na rešavanje sustava podzadataka 2. Uzeći Subtask 2 kao posao označavanja sekvence, naš sistem se oslanja na rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu po imenu BiLSTM-CNN-CRF sa bogatim lingvističkim karakteristikama, poput POS znakova, etikete za analizu zavisnosti, etikete za dijelovanje, etikete NER-a, skustering Brown. Naš sistem je postigao najviši rezultat F1 na nivou znakova i fraze.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie ettepanekuid SemEval-2018 ülesande 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using NLP. DM_NLP osales kahes alamülesandes: alamülesanne 1 liigitab, kas lausest on kasulik pahavara toimingute ja võimaluste järeldamiseks, ning alamülesanne 2 prognoosib pahavara seotud lause märgiseid ("Toiming", "Entity", "Modifier" ja "Muud"). Kuna me kasutame alaülesande 2 tulemusi otse, et järeldada alaülesande 1 tulemust, keskendub töö süsteemi lahendamisele alaülesande 2. Võttes alaülesandeks 2 järjestuse märgistamise ülesandeks, toetub meie süsteem korduvale närvivõrgule nimega BiLSTM-CNN-CRF, millel on rikkalikud keelelised omadused, nagu POS-sildid, sõltuvuse parsimise sildid, tükkimise sildid, NER-sildid, pruunid klastrid. Meie süsteem saavutas kõrgeima F1 skoori nii token tasemel kui fraasi tasemel.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje naše příspěvky pro SemEval-2018 Task 8: Sémantická extrakce z kyberbezpečnostních REportů pomocí NLP. DM_NLP se podílel na dvou dílčích úkolech: SubTask 1 klasifikuje, zda je věta užitečná pro odvození akcí a schopností malwaru a SubTask 2 předpovídá popisky tokenů ("Akce", "Entita", "Modifikátor" a "Others") pro danou větu související s malwarem. Vzhledem k tomu, že využíváme výsledky Subúkolu 2 přímo k odvození výsledku Subúkolu 1, článek se zaměřuje na systémové řešení Subúkolu 2. Přijetím Subtask 2 jako úlohy sekvenčního označování se náš systém spoléhá na recidivující neuronovou síť s názvem BiLSTM-CNN-CRF s bohatými jazykovými funkcemi, jako jsou POS tagy, analyzování závislostí štítky, kusování štítků, NER štítky, hnědé shlukování. Náš systém dosáhl nejvyššího skóre F1 v úrovni tokenů i fráze.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu les nostres presentacions per SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using NLP. El DM_NLP va participar en dues subpreguntes: La Subtasca 1 classifica si una frase és útil per inferir accions i capacitats de malware, i la Subtasca 2 prediu etiquetes de fitxes ('Acció', 'Entitat', 'Modificador' i 'Altres') per una frase relacionada amb malware dada. Com que aprofitem els resultats de la Subtasca 2 directament per deduir el resultat de la Subtasca 1, el paper es centra en la solució del sistema Subtasca 2. Amb la Subtasca 2 com a tasca d'etiqueta de seqüència, el nostre sistema es basa en una xarxa neural recurrent anomenada BiLSTM-CNN-CRF amb característiques lingüístices rics, com les etiquetes POS, etiquetes d'analització de dependencies, etiquetes de fragments, etiquetes NER, agrupació Brown. El nostre sistema va aconseguir la puntuació F1 més alta tant en el nivell de fitxes com en el de frases.", 'bn': "এই পত্রিকা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের জন্য আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা বর্ণনা করেছে: এনএলপি ব্যবহার করে সাইবার সেক্রেক্রেটিউরিটি রিপোর The DM_NLP participated in two subtasks: SubTask 1 classifies if a sentence is useful for inferring malware actions and capabilities, and SubTask 2 predicts token labels ('Action', 'Entity', 'Modifier' and 'Others') for a given malware-related sentence.  সাবকাজ ১ এর ফলাফল কমানোর জন্য আমরা সরাসরি সাবকাজের সাবেক্ষেত্রে সাবেক্ষাৎকারের ফলাফল প্রদান করেছি, সিস্টেমের দ্বারা স সাব্যাক্টাস ২ নির্ধারিত কাজ হিসেবে নিয়ে আমাদের সিস্টেম বিএলস্টিম-সিএনএন-সিএনএফ নামের একটি পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের উপর নির্ভর করে, যেমন পএস ট্যাগ, নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং লেবেল, চ Our system achieved the highest F1 score in both token level and phrase level.", 'fi': "Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan julkaisumme SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using NLP. DM_NLP osallistui kahteen alitehtävään: AlaTehtävä 1 luokittelee, onko lause hyödyllinen haittaohjelmien toimintojen ja ominaisuuksien päättelemiseen, ja AlaTehtävä 2 ennustaa token-tunnisteita ('Toiminto', 'Entity', 'Modifier' ja 'Muut') tietylle haittaohjelmaan liittyvälle lauseelle. Koska hyödynnämme alitehtävän 2 tuloksia suoraan alitehtävän 1 tuloksen päättelemiseksi, artikkeli keskittyy järjestelmän ratkaisuun alitehtävä 2. Ottamalla alitehtävä 2 sekvenssimerkinnätehtäväksi järjestelmämme luottaa toistuvaan BiLSTM-CNN-CRF-nimiseen neuroverkkoon, jossa on runsaasti kielellisiä ominaisuuksia, kuten POS-tunnisteet, riippuvuuden jäsennystarrat, niputustarrat, NER-tunnisteet, ruskea klusterointi. Järjestelmämme saavutti korkeimmat F1 pisteet sekä symbolitasolla että lausetasolla.", 'jv': 'This paper describes the available information for semi-2008 task 8: semanti extract from CibersecUrty REports used NLP. Deng Subtask 2 Ngawe nguwe Subtask 2 nganggo sistem sing wis ana ing sekondi nggawe task, sistem gunakake sistem sing wis nambah sekondi netwisan sing nganggo BiLTT-MT-CIF karo akeh dilangustik enyarno, nganggo pok tags, diphenduke karo etiket, cuakan etiket, NeR label, Braun clustering. Sistem awak dhéwé kuwi nglanggar sampeyan F1 sing paling dhéwé ning nambah token lan seneng langgar.', 'ha': "@ info DM_NLP ya haɗi cikin aikin biyu: Subaikin 1 mai fassara idan wata magana ta yi amfani da wa zartar da aikin kwamfyuta da abinci, da kuma, Tafiyar da Kayan aikin 2 na yi gaya wa alama masu haske ('Aiki', 'Shiryarwa', 'da Shiryarwa' da wasu' da aka yi wa zartar da shi. Tan da mu samar da fassarar Subaikin 2 dira zuwa ƙara matsayin Subaikin 1, takardan fokus a kan muhalli na'ura da Subaikin 2. Taking Subjob 2 as a sequence labelin aikin, system tana dõgara a kan wata na'urar neural na da aka lissafa BiLStM-CNN-CRF with rich linguistic feature, such as tags of PSS, depend on paring labels, kicing tags, labels na NER, Brown cluclushinging. Tsarinmu ya isa matsayin F1 da mafi girma cikin daraja na alama da magana.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naše prispevke za SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using NLP. DM_NLP je sodeloval pri dveh podnalogah: Podnaloga 1 razvršča, ali je stavek uporaben za sklepanje dejanj in zmogljivosti zlonamerne programske opreme, podnaloga 2 pa napoveduje oznake žetonov ("Dejanje", "Entity", "Modifier" in "Drugi") za določen stavek, povezan z zlonamerno programsko opremo. Ker izkoristimo rezultate podnaloge 2 neposredno za sklepanje rezultatov podnaloge 1, se prispevek osredotoča na reševanje sistema podnaloge 2. Z uporabo podnaloge 2 kot opravila označevanja zaporedja se naš sistem zanaša na ponavljajoče se nevronsko omrežje BiLSTM-CNN-CRF z bogatimi jezikovnimi značilnostmi, kot so oznake POS, oznake za razčlenitev odvisnosti, oznake za sestavljanje koščkov, oznake NER, Rjavo grozdje. Naš sistem je dosegel najvišjo rezultato F1 tako na stopnji žetonov kot fraze.', 'he': "This paper describes our submissions for SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using NLP.  The DM_NLP participated in two subtasks: SubTask 1 classifies if a sentence is useful for inferring malware actions and capabilities, and SubTask 2 predicts token labels ('Action', 'Entity', 'Modifier' and 'Others') for a given malware-related sentence.  מאחר שאנחנו משתמשים בתוצאות של Subtask 2 ישירות כדי להוציא תוצאה של Subtask 1, הנייר מתמקד על פתרון מערכת Subtask 2. על ידי לקחת את Subtask 2 בתור משימה תווית רצף, המערכת שלנו סומכת על רשת עצבית חוזרת בשם BiLSTM-CNN-CRF עם תכונות שפתיים עשירות, כמו תוויות POS, תוויות מעבדת תלויות, תוויות חתיכות, תוויות NER, קבוצות בראון. המערכת שלנו השיגה את נקודת F1 הגבוהה ביותר ברמה של סימנים ורמה של ביטויים.", 'bo': "ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་དུ་SemEval-2018 Task 8:Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using NLP. The DM_NLP participated in two subtasks: SubTask 1 classifies if a sentence is useful for inferring malware actions and capabilities, and SubTask 2 predicts token labels ('Action', 'Entity', 'Modifier' and 'Others') for a given malware-related sentence. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཉིས་ལས་གནོད་འགྲུལ་གྱི་གནོད་འགྲུལ་ལྡན་མ་བཏོན་པ་ལས། ཡིག་ཆ་དེ་མ་ལག་ལས་གནོད་འགྲུལ་ལྡན་2 By taking Subtask 2 as a sequence labeling task, our system relies on a recurrent neural network named BiLSTM-CNN-CRF with rich linguistic features, such as POS tags, dependency parsing labels, chunking labels, NER labels, Brown clustering. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་རྟགས་ཚན་མ་ཚད་དང་ཚིག་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཐོ་ཚད་དགའ་ཤོས་ཡོད།"}
{'en': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9 : Hypernym Discovery', 'ar': 'SemEval-2018 المهمة 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'es': 'Tarea 9 de SemEval-2018: Descubrimiento de Hypernym', 'pt': 'Tarefa 9 do SemEval-2018: descoberta de hiperônimos', 'fr': "SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 9\xa0: Découverte d'Hypernym", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 9: Hypernym डिस्कवरी', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018 务 9:超能见', 'ru': 'SemEval-2018 Задача 9: Обнаружение гипернима', 'ga': 'SemEval-2018 Tasc 9: Fionnachtain Hypernym', 'hu': 'SemEval-2018 9. feladat: Hypernym felfedezése', 'ka': 'SemEval-2018 დავალება 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'el': 'SemEval-2018 Εργασία 9: Αποκάλυψη υπερνύμων', 'kk': 'Жалпы- 2018 тапсырма 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'it': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'mk': 'SemEval-2018 задача 9: Откривање на хиперними', 'lt': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'ms': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 9: Penemuan Hypernym', 'mt': 'SemEval-2018 Kompitu 9: Żvelar tal-Ipernim', 'ml': 'SemEval- 2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'no': 'HalvEval-2018 Oppgåve 9: Hypernymoppdaging', 'pl': 'SemEval-2018 Zadanie 9: Wykrywanie hipernimu', 'ro': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'sr': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'si': 'Half- 2018 වැඩ 9: හායිපර්නිම් හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'SemEval-2018 Shaqooyinka 9: Discovery Hypernym', 'ur': 'نیم اول-2018 ٹاکس ۹: ہیپر نیم ڈیسکوری', 'sv': 'SemEval-2018 Uppgift 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'ta': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-208 9: Quá trình giảm xóc.', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Откриване на хиперними', 'nl': 'SemEval-2018 Taak 9: Hyperniem Discovery', 'hr': 'Zadnji zadatak 9: otkrivanje hipernima', 'da': 'SemEval-2018 Opgave 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'de': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'sw': 'SemEval-2018 Kazi 9: Utafiti wa Hypernym', 'tr': 'Orta-2018 Görev 9: Hipernim Araştırması', 'af': 'SemEval-2018 Opdrag 9: Hypernym Ontdekking', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 9: 슈퍼 이름 발견', 'id': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 9: Penemuan Hypernym', 'hy': 'Comment', 'fa': 'عملۀ نیم Eval-2018 9: پیدا کردن هوپر نیم', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'bs': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'sq': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'ca': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'cs': 'SemEval-2018 Úloha 9: Zjištění hypernymů', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'fi': 'SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 9: Hypernyymien löytäminen', 'bn': 'SemEval-2018 কাজ ৯: হাইপার্নিম ডিস্কোরি', 'et': 'SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 9: hüpernüümide avastamine', 'jv': 'Sample rate', 'he': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery', 'sk': 'SemEval-2018 Naloga 9: Odkrivanje hipernimov', 'ha': 'QWebPage', 'bo': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: Hypernym Discovery'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery. We put forward this task as a complementary benchmark for modeling hypernymy, a problem which has traditionally been cast as a binary classification task, taking a pair of candidate words as input. Instead, our reformulated task is defined as follows : given an input term, retrieve (or discover) its suitable hypernyms from a target corpus. We proposed five different subtasks covering three languages (English, Spanish, and Italian), and two specific domains of knowledge in English (Medical and Music). Participants were allowed to compete in any or all of the subtasks. Overall, a total of 11 teams participated, with a total of 39 different systems submitted through all subtasks. Data, results and further information about the task can be found at.https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119.\n    ', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مهمة SemEval 2018 المشتركة حول اكتشاف Hypernym. لقد طرحنا هذه المهمة كمعيار تكميلي لنمذجة hypernymy ، وهي مشكلة تم اعتبارها تقليديًا مهمة تصنيف ثنائية ، مع الأخذ بزوج من الكلمات المرشحة كمدخلات. بدلاً من ذلك ، يتم تعريف مهمتنا المعاد صياغتها على النحو التالي: إعطاء مصطلح إدخال ، استرداد (أو اكتشاف) التشعبات التشعبية المناسبة من مجموعة الهدف. اقترحنا خمس مهام فرعية مختلفة تغطي ثلاث لغات (الإنجليزية والإسبانية والإيطالية) ومجالين محددين للمعرفة في اللغة الإنجليزية (الطبية والموسيقى). سُمح للمشاركين بالمنافسة في أي من المهام الفرعية أو جميعها. بشكل عام ، شارك ما مجموعه 11 فريقًا ، مع ما مجموعه 39 نظامًا مختلفًا تم تقديمها من خلال جميع المهام الفرعية. يمكن العثور على البيانات والنتائج والمزيد من المعلومات حول المهمة على <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119>.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la tâche partagée SemEval 2018 sur la découverte d'hypernym. Nous avons proposé cette tâche comme une référence complémentaire pour la modélisation de l'hypernymie, un problème qui a traditionnellement été présenté comme une tâche de classification binaire, en utilisant une paire de mots candidats comme entrée. Au lieu de cela, notre tâche reformulée est définie comme suit\xa0: à partir d'un terme saisi, récupérer (ou découvrir) ses hyperonymes appropriés à partir d'un corpus cible. Nous avons proposé cinq sous-tâches différentes couvrant trois langues (anglais, espagnol et italien) et deux domaines de connaissances spécifiques en anglais (médecine et musique). Les participants étaient autorisés à participer à l'une ou l'ensemble des sous-tâches. Au total, 11 équipes ont participé, avec un total de 39 systèmes différents soumis pour toutes les sous-tâches. Les données, les résultats et d'autres informations sur la tâche peuvent être consultés à l'adresse < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a tarefa compartilhada SemEval 2018 na descoberta de hiperônimos. Apresentamos esta tarefa como uma referência complementar para modelar a hipernímia, um problema que tradicionalmente tem sido lançado como uma tarefa de classificação binária, tomando como entrada um par de palavras candidatas. Em vez disso, nossa tarefa reformulada é definida da seguinte forma: dado um termo de entrada, recupere (ou descubra) seus hiperônimos adequados de um corpus alvo. Propusemos cinco subtarefas diferentes abrangendo três idiomas (inglês, espanhol e italiano) e dois domínios específicos de conhecimento em inglês (médico e música). Os participantes foram autorizados a competir em qualquer uma ou todas as subtarefas. No geral, um total de 11 equipes participaram, com um total de 39 sistemas diferentes submetidos em todas as subtarefas. Dados, resultados e mais informações sobre a tarefa podem ser encontrados em <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119>.', 'es': 'Este documento describe la tarea compartida de SemEval 2018 sobre el descubrimiento de Hypernym. Presentamos esta tarea como un punto de referencia complementario para modelar la hipernemia, un problema que tradicionalmente se ha presentado como una tarea de clasificación binaria, tomando un par de palabras candidatas como entrada. En cambio, nuestra tarea reformulada se define de la siguiente manera: dado un término de entrada, recuperar (o descubrir) sus hiperónimos adecuados de un corpus objetivo. Propusimos cinco subtareas diferentes que abarcaban tres idiomas (inglés, español e italiano) y dos dominios específicos de conocimiento en inglés (Medicina y Música). Se permitió a los participantes competir en cualquiera o en todas las subtareas. En total, participaron un total de 11 equipos, con un total de 39 sistemas diferentes enviados a través de todas las subtareas. Puede encontrar datos, resultados e información adicional sobre la tarea en < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'zh': '本文言 Hypernym Discovery 上 SemEval 2018 共事。 臣等建模hyponymy补,塑造成二元类,以双候选词为输。 给定一输项,检语料库中(或见)其超名词。 五子之事,涵盖三言(英语,西班牙语与意大利语),及英语之二特定(医乐)。 参与者可与争。 凡11团队与焉,39异统而任之。 其数,则与更多信息可得于<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119>。', 'ja': 'この論文では、ハイパーニムディスカバリーに関するSemEval 2018共有タスクについて説明します。私たちは、このタスクをハイパーニミーをモデリングするための補完的なベンチマークとして提唱しました。この問題は、一対の候補語を入力として、バイナリ分類タスクとして伝統的にキャストされてきました。代わりに、私たちの再定式化されたタスクは次のように定義されます。入力項を与えられた場合、ターゲットコーパスからその適切な超ニームを取得（または発見）します。3つの言語（英語、スペイン語、イタリア語）をカバーする5つの異なるサブタスクと、英語の知識の2つの特定の領域（医療と音楽）を提案しました。参加者は、サブタスクのいずれかまたはすべてに参加することができました。全体では、合計11チームが参加し、すべてのサブタスクを通じて合計39の異なるシステムが提出されました。タスクに関するデータ、結果、および詳細情報は、を参照してください<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119>。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर Hypernym डिस्कवरी पर SemEval 2018 साझा कार्य का वर्णन करता है। हमने इस कार्य को मॉडलिंग हाइपरनॉमी के लिए एक पूरक बेंचमार्क के रूप में आगे रखा, एक समस्या जिसे पारंपरिक रूप से बाइनरी वर्गीकरण कार्य के रूप में डाला गया है, जो इनपुट के रूप में उम्मीदवार शब्दों की एक जोड़ी को ले रहा है। इसके बजाय, हमारे पुनर्निर्मित कार्य को निम्नानुसार परिभाषित किया गया है: एक इनपुट शब्द दिया गया है, एक लक्ष्य कॉर्पस से इसके उपयुक्त हाइपरनिम्स को पुनर्प्राप्त (या खोज) प्राप्त करें। हमने तीन भाषाओं (अंग्रेजी, स्पेनिश और इतालवी) को कवर करने वाले पांच अलग-अलग उप-कार्यों का प्रस्ताव दिया, और अंग्रेजी में ज्ञान के दो विशिष्ट डोमेन (चिकित्सा और संगीत)। प्रतिभागियों को किसी भी या सभी उप-कार्यों में प्रतिस्पर्धा करने की अनुमति दी गई थी। कुल मिलाकर, कुल 11 टीमों ने भाग लिया, जिसमें कुल 39 अलग-अलग प्रणालियों को सभी उप-कार्यों के माध्यम से प्रस्तुत किया गया। कार्य के बारे में डेटा, परिणाम और आगे की जानकारी <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119> पर पाई जा सकती है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается совместная задача SemEval 2018 по обнаружению гипернима. Мы выдвинули эту задачу в качестве дополнительного критерия для моделирования гипернимии, задачу, которая традиционно ставилась как задача двоичной классификации, принимая в качестве входных данных пару слов-кандидатов. Вместо этого наша переформулированная задача определяется следующим образом: при заданном входном термине извлечь (или обнаружить) его подходящие гипернимы из целевого корпуса. Мы предложили пять различных подзадач, охватывающих три языка (английский, испанский и итальянский), и две конкретные области знаний на английском языке (медицинский и музыкальный). Участникам было разрешено участвовать в любой или во всех подзадачах. В общей сложности в нем приняли участие 11 групп, при этом в рамках всех подзадач было представлено в общей сложности 39 различных систем. Данные, результаты и дополнительную информацию о задаче можно найти по адресу<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119>.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar Thasc Roinnte SemEval 2018 ar Fhionnachtain Hypernym. Chuireamar an tasc seo chun cinn mar thagarmharc comhlántach chun hipearnamaíocht a shamhaltú, fadhb a caitheadh go traidisiúnta mar thasc aicmithe dhénártha, ag glacadh le péire d’fhocail iarrthóra mar ionchur. Ina áit sin, is mar seo a leanas a shainmhínítear ár dtasc athfhoirmithe: má thugtar téarma ionchuir, faigh (nó faigh amach) a hipearnainmneacha oiriúnacha ó spriocchorpas. Mholamar cúig fhothasc dhifriúla a chlúdódh trí theanga (Béarla, Spáinnis, agus Iodáilis), agus dhá shainréimse eolais i mBéarla (Leighis agus Ceol). Bhí cead ag rannpháirtithe dul san iomaíocht i gceann ar bith nó i ngach ceann de na subtascanna. Ar an iomlán, ghlac 11 fhoireann páirt, agus cuireadh 39 córas éagsúil isteach trí gach fothasc. Tá sonraí, torthaí agus tuilleadh eolais faoin tasc le fáil ag < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119>.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány ismerteti a SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery-t. Ezt a feladatot kiegészítő referenciaértékként állítottuk elő a hipernímia modellezéséhez, amelyet hagyományosan bináris osztályozási feladatként vetünk be, és egy pár jelölt szót vettünk bevitelnek. Ehelyett az átdolgozott feladatunk a következőképpen kerül meghatározásra: beviteli kifejezés megadásával visszaszerezzük (vagy fedezzük fel) a megfelelő hiperniméket egy célkorpuszból. Öt különböző alterületet javasoltunk három nyelvre (angol, spanyol és olasz), valamint két angol nyelvtudási területre (orvosi és zenei). A résztvevők versenyezhettek bármelyik részfeladatban vagy az összes részfeladatban. Összességében összesen 11 csapat vett részt, összesen 39 különböző rendszert nyújtottak be az összes alcsoportban. Adatok, eredmények és további információk a feladatról a < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει την κοινή εργασία για την ανακάλυψη υπερνύμων. Προτείναμε αυτό το έργο ως συμπληρωματικό σημείο αναφοράς για τη μοντελοποίηση της υπερνυμίας, ένα πρόβλημα που παραδοσιακά έχει τεθεί ως εργασία δυαδικής ταξινόμησης, λαμβάνοντας ένα ζευγάρι υποψήφιων λέξεων ως εισαγωγή. Αντίθετα, η επαναδιατυπωμένη εργασία μας ορίζεται ως εξής: δεδομένου ενός όρου εισαγωγής, ανακτήστε (ή ανακαλύψτε) τα κατάλληλα υπερνύμια του από ένα σώμα προορισμού. Προτείναμε πέντε διαφορετικές επιμέρους εργασίες που καλύπτουν τρεις γλώσσες (Αγγλικά, Ισπανικά και Ιταλικά), και δύο συγκεκριμένους τομείς γνώσης στα Αγγλικά (Ιατρική και Μουσική). Οι συμμετέχοντες είχαν τη δυνατότητα να διαγωνιστούν σε οποιαδήποτε ή όλες τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Συνολικά, συμμετείχαν συνολικά 11 ομάδες, με συνολικά 39 διαφορετικά συστήματα που υποβλήθηκαν σε όλες τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Δεδομένα, αποτελέσματα και περισσότερες πληροφορίες σχετικά με την εργασία μπορείτε να βρείτε στο < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის გამოსახულება 2018 SemEval-ის საზოგადომი დავალება ჰიპერნიმური დისკოფერზე. ჩვენ ამ საქაღალდეს დავიწყეთ როგორც კომპლენტერიური ბენქმარი ჰიპერნიმის მოდელირებისთვის, პრობლემა, რომელიც ტრადიციურად იყო ბინერი კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობა, რომელიც კონ შემდეგ, ჩვენი რეფორმეტულაციული დავალება განსაზღვრებულია როგორც შემდეგ: მივიღეთ შეტყობინებული ტერმინი, მივიღეთ (ან აღმოჩენეთ) მისი საჭირო ჰიპერნიმი მიზეზი ჩვენ მივიღეთ ხუთი განსხვავებული სამუშაო სამუშაო ენები (ანგლისური, სპანელი და იტალიური) და ორი განსხვავებული კონფიგური კონფიგური კონფიგური კო მოთავსწავლებელების შესაძლებლობა ყველაფერი ან ყველაფერი შესაძლებლობაში გაკეთება. ყველაფერი 11 ჯგუფი გადაწყვეტილია, 39 განსხვავებული სისტემი, რომელიც ყველაფერი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი. მონაცემები, წარმოდგენები და დამატებული ინფორმაცია რაოდენობის შესახებ < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 - ეა.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive l'attività condivisa SemEval 2018 sulla scoperta di Hypernym. Abbiamo proposto questo compito come benchmark complementare per la modellazione dell'ipernimia, un problema che è stato tradizionalmente lanciato come un compito di classificazione binaria, prendendo come input una coppia di parole candidate. Invece, il nostro compito riformulato è definito come segue: dato un termine di input, recuperare (o scoprire) i suoi hypernyms adatti da un corpus target. Abbiamo proposto cinque diversi sottocompiti che coprono tre lingue (inglese, spagnolo e italiano) e due specifici domini di conoscenza in inglese (medico e musica). I partecipanti sono stati autorizzati a competere in una o tutte le sottoattività. Complessivamente, un totale di 11 squadre hanno partecipato, con un totale di 39 sistemi diversi presentati attraverso tutte le sottoattività. Dati, risultati e ulteriori informazioni sull'attività possono essere trovati su < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың бөлшектелген тапсырманы Hypernym Discovery- ға таңдайды. Бұл тапсырманы гипернимді моделдеу үшін қосымша бағдарлама ретінде жібердік, әдетте бинарлық классификациялау тапсырмасы ретінде жіберілген мәселе болып, келтірілген бірнеше сөзді келтіру үшін Осының орнына, біздің реформуляцияланған тапсырмамыз келесі ретінде анықталды: кіріс термині берілген, оның қолданыстағы гипернимдерін мақсатты корпустан алу (немесе табу) берілген. Біз үш тіл (ағылшын, испан және итальян) және ағылшын тілінде білім күйінің екі ерекше доменін ұсындық. Қатысушыларға кез-келген немесе барлық суреттерге бөліну рұқсат етілді. Барлық 11 топ қатынады, барлық ішкі сұрақтар арқылы 39 түрлі жүйелер бар. Тапсырма туралы деректер, нәтижелер және қосымша мәлімет < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma 2018 m. SemEval bendra užduotis, susijusi su hipernimų aptikimu. Mes pasiūlėme šią užduotį kaip papildomą hiperinimos modeliavimo kriterijų, problem ą, kuri tradiciškai buvo iškelta kaip dvigubo klasifikavimo užduotis, ir kaip įnašą paimti dviejų kandidatų žodžių. Vietoj to, mūsų reformuliuota užduotis apibrėžiama taip: atsižvelgiant į įvedamąjį terminą, iš tikslinio korpuso atgauti (arba atrasti) tinkamus hiperinimus. Siūlėme penkis skirtingus paklausimus, apimančius tris kalbas (anglų, ispanų ir italų kalbomis) ir dvi konkrečias žinių anglų kalba sritis (medicina ir muzika). Dalyviams buvo leista konkuruoti bet kuriame arba visuose paklausimuose. Iš viso dalyvavo 11 komandų, iš viso 39 skirtingos sistemos buvo pateiktos per visus paklausimus. Data, results and further information about the task can be found at < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ја опишува SemEval 2018 Соделена задача за хипернимско откритие. Ја претставуваме оваа задача како комплементарна референтна мерка за моделирање на хипернимијата, проблем кој традиционално е фрлен како бинарна класификациска задача, земајќи пар кандидатски зборови како влог. Наместо тоа, нашата реформирана задача е дефинирана како што следи: со вклучен термин, земете (или откријте) соодветни хиперними од цел корпус. We proposed five different subtasks covering three languages (English, Spanish, and Italian), and two specific domains of knowledge in English (Medical and Music).  Учесниците имаа дозвола да се натпреваруваат во било која или сите потпрашања. Вкупно учествуваа 11 тимови, вкупно 39 различни системи поднесени преку сите потпрашања. Податоците, резултатите и понатамошните информации за задачата се наоѓаат на < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan Tugas Berkongsi SemEval 2018 pada Penemuan Hipernim. Kami melanjutkan tugas ini sebagai tanda rujukan tambahan untuk model hipernimi, masalah yang tradisional telah dilemparkan sebagai tugas klasifikasi binari, mengambil sepasang kata calon sebagai input. Sebaliknya, tugas kita diubah ditentukan seperti ini: diberikan term a input, mendapatkan (atau temukan) hipernim yang sesuai dari korpus sasaran. Kami mencadangkan lima sub-tanya yang berbeza meliputi tiga bahasa (Bahasa Inggeris, Sepanyol, dan Itali), dan dua bidang khusus pengetahuan dalam bahasa Inggeris (Perubatan dan Muzik). Peserta dibenarkan untuk bersaing dalam mana-mana atau semua sub-tanya. Secara umum, 11 pasukan berpartisipasi, dengan total 39 sistem berbeza dihantar melalui semua subtasks. Data, keputusan dan maklumat lanjut mengenai tugas boleh ditemui di < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിം ഡിസ്ക്വറിയില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത പണിയെക്കുറിച്ച് വിവരിക്കുന്നു. ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലി മുന്നോട്ട് വെച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പാഠമായി ഒരു ബൈനര്\u200d ക്ലാ പകരം നമ്മുടെ സംസ്കാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലി പിന്നില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതാണ്: ഒരു ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വാക്ക് കൊടുത്താല്\u200d, അതിന്\u200dറെ ആവശ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മൂന്നു ഭാഷകളെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള അഞ്ചു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഉപജോലികള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്തു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ വിശിഷ്ടമായ ജ്ഞാ പങ്കാളികള്\u200d ഏതെങ്കിലും സബ്ട്ജിസിലും മത്സരിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിച്ചിരുന്നു. മൊത്തം 11 ടീമുകള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു, മൊത്തം 39 വ്യത്യസ്ത സിസ്റ്റമുണ്ട്, എല്ലാ സബ്ട്ടോസുകളിലൂടെയും കൊടുത ജോലിയെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, ഫലങ്ങളും കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളും ലഭ്യമല്ല < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-SemEval 2018 Kompitu Konġunt dwar l-Iskopri tal-Ipernimi. Aħna ppreżentajna dan il-kompitu bħala punt ta’ riferiment kumplimentari għall-immudellar tal-ipernimja, problem a li tradizzjonalment ġiet espressa bħala kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni binarja, filwaqt li ttieħdu żewġ kliem kandidati bħala input. Minflok, il-kompitu riformulat tagħna huwa definit kif ġej: meta jingħata terminu ta’ input, iġbor (jew jiskopri) l-iperinimi xierqa tiegħu minn korpus fil-mira. Proponijna ħames sottomistoqsijiet differenti li jkopru tliet lingwi (Ingliż, Spanjol, u Taljan), u żewġ oqsma speċifiċi ta’ għarfien bl-Ingliż (Mediku u Mużika). Il-parteċipanti setgħu jikkompetu fi kwalunkwe sottomistoqsija jew fis-sottomistoqsijiet kollha. B’mod ġenerali, ħadu sehem total ta’ 11-il tim, b’total ta’ 39 sistema differenti ppreżentati permezz tas-sottomistoqsijiet kollha. Id-dejta, ir-riżultati u aktar informazzjoni dwar il-kompitu jistgħu jinstabu fuq < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2018 оны Хиперним Дисковерийн SemEval-ын хуваалтын ажлыг тайлбарладаг. Бид үүнийг гиперним загварын модель болгох даалгавар болгосон. Энэ асуудал нь уламжлалтай хоёр дахь хуваалтын ажил болсон. Хоёр даалгаварын үгийг оруулах болно. Үүний оронд, бидний шинэчлэгдсэн ажил нь ингэж тодорхойлж байна: орлуулах томъёог өгсөн, зорилготой корпус-аас эзэмшигтэй гиперним авах (эсвэл олж мэдэх) боломжтой. Бид гурван хэл (Англи, Испан, Итали) болон Англи хэлний мэдлэг (эмнэлгийн болон хөгжмийн) хоёр төрлийн сургалтыг санал болгосон. Хэрэглэгчдийн оролцогчдын аль нэг эсвэл бүх асуудлын талаар өрсөлдөх боломжтой. Ихэнхдээ 11 баг оролцсон бөгөөд бүх сургуульд 39 өөр системтэй. Өгөгдлийн үр дүнг болон ажлын тухай нэмэлт мэдээлэл < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'no': 'Denne papiret skildrar semiEval 2018 delt oppgåve på hypernymoppdaging. Vi legg fram denne oppgåva som eit komplementar benchmarke for modellering av hypernimum, eit problem som tradisjonell er kast som ein binær klassifikasjon oppgåve, som tar eit par kandidatord som inndata. I staden er vårt reformerte oppgåve definert som følgjande: gitt eit inndata- uttrykk, hent (eller oppdag) dei passande hypernymane frå eit målskorpus. Vi foreslåde fem forskjellige underspørsmål som dekkar tre språk (engelsk, spansk og italiansk), og to spesifikke kunnskap på engelsk (Medikal og musikk). Deltakarane vart tillatt å kompetere i alle eller alle underspørjingane. Overalt delta 11 grupper med totalt 39 forskjellige systemar som vert sendt gjennom alle underspørjingar. Data, resultat og meir informasjon om oppgåva kan finnast på < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernim Discovery. Przedstawiliśmy to zadanie jako uzupełniający punkt odniesienia dla modelowania hipernimii, problem, który tradycyjnie był postrzegany jako zadanie klasyfikacji binarnej, biorąc parę słów kandydatów jako wejście. Zamiast tego nasze przeformułowane zadanie jest zdefiniowane w następujący sposób: podając termin wejściowy, pobierz (lub odkryj) jego odpowiednie hipernimy z korpusu docelowego. Zaproponowaliśmy pięć różnych podzadań obejmujących trzy języki (angielski, hiszpański i włoski) oraz dwie specyficzne dziedziny wiedzy w języku angielskim (medycyna i muzyka). Uczestnicy mogli uczestniczyć w dowolnym lub wszystkich podzadaniach. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc udział w nim udział jedenaście zespołów, z łącznie 39 różnych systemów zgłaszanych przez wszystkie podzadania. Dane, wyniki i dalsze informacje na temat zadania można znaleźć pod adresem < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery. Am propus această sarcină ca un reper complementar pentru modelarea hipernimii, o problemă care a fost în mod tradițional introdusă ca o sarcină de clasificare binară, luând o pereche de cuvinte candidate ca input. În schimb, sarcina noastră reformulată este definită după cum urmează: dată fiind un termen de intrare, recuperați (sau descoperiți) hipernimele sale adecvate dintr-un corpus țintă. Am propus cinci subactivități diferite care acoperă trei limbi (engleză, spaniolă și italiană) și două domenii specifice de cunoaștere în limba engleză (medicală și muzică). Participanților li s-a permis să concureze în oricare sau toate subactivitățile. În total, au participat 11 echipe, cu un total de 39 de sisteme diferite depuse prin toate subactivitățile. Date, rezultate și informații suplimentare despre activitate pot fi găsite la < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ හායිපර්නිම් විශ්වාසයේ සේම්වල් 2018 කාරණාකරණ වැඩක් විස්තර කරනවා. අපි මේ කාර්යය හායිපර්නිමි විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, බායිනාර් විදියට විදියට ප ඒ වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ සුරකුණු වැඩක් පස්සේ විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ: ඇතුළු වාර්තාවක් දීලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒක ගොඩක් හොයාගන අපි වෙනස් භාෂාවක් තුනක් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා වගේම වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පහයි (ඉංග්\u200dරීසි, ස්පැනිස්, ඉතාලියාන සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන්ට අවසර වුනා කිසිම දෙයක් නැත්තම් හැම දෙයක්ම සටන් කරන්න. සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, කණ්ඩායම් 11 කණ්ඩායම් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණයෙන් වෙනස් පද්ධතියක් 39 ක් තියෙනවා. < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay Shaqada la sharciyey SemEval 2018 oo ku saabsan Finnishka Hypernym. Waxaannu shaqadaas u dhigaynaa qoraal kamid ah oo u sameynaya hypernymi, dhibaato ah oo sida caadiga ah loo tuuray shaqo fasax labaad ah, waxaana qaadanayaa laba hadal oo candidaha ah sida input. Shaqadayada la hagaajiyey waxaa lagu qoraa sida soo socda: in la siiyo waqti la soo geliyo, ka qaado (ama kasoo qaado) midhihiisa ku haboon koroorka goalka. Waxaan soo jeednay shan shaqooyin oo kala duduwan oo ku qoran saddex luuqadood (Ingiriis, Isbanish, iyo Talyaani), iyo laba goobo aqoon oo gaar ah oo aqoon ku qoran Ingiriis (caafimaad iyo muusik). Ka qeybqaadayaasha waxaa loo ogolaaday in ay ku qeybqaadan karaan shaqaalaha oo dhan ama dhamaan. Dhammaan 11 koox oo ka mid ah ayaa ka qayb galay, wuxuuna la jiray 39 nidaam oo kala duduwan oo lagu soo dhiibay shaqaalaha oo dhan. Macluumaad, resultinta iyo macluumaad dheeraad ah oo la xiriira shaqada waxaad ka heleysaa < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje podijeljeni zadatak za pola Eval 2018 o hipernimu Discovery. Predložili smo ovaj zadatak kao komplementarnu kritiku za modeliranje hipernimi, problem koji je tradicionalno postavljen kao dvojni zadatak klasifikacije, uzimajući par kandidatskih reči kao ulaz. Umesto toga, naš reformirani zadatak je definisan kao sljedeći: s obzirom na ulazni izraz, povlači (ili otkrivaju) odgovarajuće hipernime iz ciljnog korpusa. Predložili smo pet različitih podataka koji pokrivaju tri jezika (engleski, španjolski i italijanski), i dve specifične oblasti znanja na engleskom jeziku (medicinski i muzika). Učesnicima je dozvoljeno da se natječu u bilo kojoj ili svim podkazama. Ukupno, sudjelovalo je ukupno 11 timova, sa ukupno 39 različitih sustava podignuta kroz sve podatke. Podaci, rezultati i daljnje informacije o zadatku se nalaze na < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery. Vi föreslog denna uppgift som ett komplementärt riktmärke för modellering av hypernymi, ett problem som traditionellt har kastats som en binär klassificeringsuppgift, med ett par kandidatord som indata. Istället definieras vår omformulerade uppgift enligt följande: med en inmatningsterm, hämta (eller upptäck) dess lämpliga hypernymer från en målkorpus. Vi föreslog fem olika underuppgifter som täcker tre språk (engelska, spanska och italienska) och två specifika kunskapsområden på engelska (medicin och musik). Deltagarna fick tävla i någon eller alla deluppgifter. Totalt deltog 11 lag, varav totalt 39 olika system skickades in genom alla deluppgifter. Data, resultat och ytterligare information om uppgiften finns på < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery. ہم نے اس کام کو ہیرنیمی کی مدل کرنے کے لئے اضافہ کی بنچم مارک بنایا ہے، ایک مسئلہ جس کی پیدائش میں ایک دوسری کلاسیفون کا کام بنا دیا گیا ہے، اور ایک کلمہ کا دو کلمہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اس کے عوض ہماری اصلاح کی کوشش اسی طرح مفصل کی گئی ہے: ایک مدت مقرر کی گئی ہے، اپنے مناسب افراد کو ایک موجود جسم سے اٹھا لو، ہم نے پانچ مختلف سوٹسٹ کی پیشنهاد کی کہ تین زبان (انگلیسی، اسپانیایی، اور ایتالیایی) اور دو مختلف علم کے دونوں دامنوں کو انگلیسی (پزشکی اور موسیقی) میں پورا کریں۔ حضار کرنے والوں کو کسی یا ہر قسم کے سوال میں مسابقه کرنے کی اجازت دی گئی تھی. عملہ میں، 11 ٹیموں میں ایک جمع شریک ہوا، 39 مختلف سیستموں کے ساتھ جو تمام سٹسٹسٹ کے ذریعے پیش کیے گئے۔ Data, results and further information can be found at <task> https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் SemEval 2018 ஹைப்பர்னிம் கண்டுபிடிப்பில் பகிர்ந்த பணியை விளக்குகிறது. நாம் இந்த செயலை முன்னோக்கும் பிரச்சனையாக முன்னோக்குகிறோம், அது ஒரு பிரச்சனையாக இருந்து வகைப்படுத்தல் செயலாக பிரச்சனை பதிலாக, எங்கள் சீர்திருத்தப்பட்ட செயல் பின்வரும் வரையறுக்கப்படுகிறது: ஒரு உள்ளீட்டு வார்த்தையை கொடுத்து, அதன் பொருத்தமான உயரமைப் நாங்கள் மூன்று மொழிகளை மூலம் மற்றும் ஆங்கிலம், ஸ்பானிஷ், மற்றும் இத்தாலியன் மூலம் மற்றும் இரண்டு குறிப்பிட்ட அறிவிப்பு மூ பங்கீட்டாளர்கள் எந்த அல்லது எல்லா உப பணிகளிலும் போராட அனுமதிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. மொத்தமாக, மொத்தமான 11 குழுக்கள் பங்கிடப்பட்டனர், மொத்தமாக 39 வேறு துணை பணிகள் மூலம் கொடுக்கப்பட்டு < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz Hypernym disk qismida SemEval 2018 shartlangan vazifani anglatadi. Biz bu vazifani hypernimni modellash uchun kompyuterlik benchmark sifatida qo'yishingiz mumkin. Bu muammolar odatda ikkita darajalashtirish vazifasi deb hisoblanadi. Uning oʻrniga, bizning tahrirlangan vazifasimiz quyidagi deb aniqlanadi: kiritish soʻzni koʻrsatilgan, qidirish qutisidan oʻxshash hypernimlarni olib tashlash (yoki aniqlash). Biz uch tillar (Ingliz, Ispanchada, Italyani) va ingliz tilida ma'lum bo'lgan ikki foydalanuvchilarni boshqa 5 xil vazifalar bilan boshladik. Муаллифлар барча масъалаларда ёки барча суҳбатларга таклиф қилишга рухсат берилди. Umumiy, 11 guruhi hamma vazifalar orqali joʻnatilgan 39 turli tizimlar bilan. Data, results and further information about the task can be found at < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả Nhiệm vụ chia sẻ của SemEvl vượt cao Disco. Chúng tôi đưa ra nhiệm vụ này như một tiêu chuẩn bổ sung cho việc mô phỏng siêu năng, một vấn đề đã được chọn theo truyền thống là một nhiệm vụ phân loại nhị phân, lấy một cặp từ ứng cử viên để nhập vào. Thay vào đó, nhiệm vụ cải cách của chúng ta được xác định như sau: dùng một thuật ngữ nhập, lấy hay khám phá những siêu năng lượng thích hợp từ một tập thể mục tiêu. Chúng tôi đề xuất năm loại phụ đề xuất ba ngôn ngữ khác nhau (Anh, Tây Ban Nha, Ý) và hai lĩnh vực đặc biệt về kiến thức tiếng Anh (Y học và Âm nhạc). Những người tham gia được cho phép cạnh tranh trong bất kỳ hay tất cả các mặt phụ đề. Tổng hợp là cả một đội 11, với một số hệ thống hoàn toàn khác nhau được gửi qua tất cả các mặt phụ đề. Dữ liệu, kết quả và thông tin thêm về nhiệm vụ có thể tìm thấy ở https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 -̀.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва споделената задача за откриване на хиперними. Предложихме тази задача като допълнителен еталон за моделиране на хипернимията, проблем, който традиционно се поставя като задача за двоична класификация, като се вземат двойка кандидати думи като вход. Вместо това нашата реформирана задача се дефинира както следва: даден входен термин, извличане (или откриване) на подходящите хиперними от целевия корпус. Предложихме пет различни подзадачи, обхващащи три езика (английски, испански и италиански) и две специфични области на познанието по английски език (медицина и музика). Участниците имаха право да се състезават в някоя или всички подзадачи. Общо 11 екипа участваха, като общо 39 различни системи бяха представени по всички подзадачи. Данни, резултати и допълнителна информация за задачата можете да намерите на < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'da': 'Dette dokument beskriver SemEval 2018 delt opgave på Hypernym Discovery. Vi fremlagde denne opgave som et komplementært benchmark for modellering af hypernymi, et problem, der traditionelt er blevet kastet som en binær klassifikationsopgave, og som tager et par kandidatord som input. I stedet er vores omformulerede opgave defineret som følger: Givet et input term, hente (eller opdage) dens egnede hypernymer fra et målkorpus. Vi foreslog fem forskellige underopgaver, der dækker tre sprog (engelsk, spansk og italiensk), og to specifikke vidensområder på engelsk (medicinsk og musik). Deltagerne fik lov til at konkurrere i nogen eller alle underopgaver. Samlet set deltog i alt 11 hold, hvoraf i alt 39 forskellige systemer blev indsendt gennem alle underopgaver. Data, resultater og yderligere oplysninger om opgaven kan findes på < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje podijeljeni zadatak za pola Eval 2018 o hipernimu Discovery. Predložili smo ovaj zadatak kao komplementarnu kritiku za modeliranje hipernimi, problem koji je tradicionalno postavljen kao dvojni zadatak klasifikacije, uzimajući par kandidatskih riječi kao ulaz. Umjesto toga, naš reformirani zadatak je definiran kao sljedeći: s obzirom na ulazni izraz, povući (ili otkrivati) odgovarajuće hipernimke iz ciljnog korpusa. Predložili smo pet različitih podataka koji obuhvaćaju tri jezika (engleski, španjolski i italijanski), i dvije specifične područje znanja na engleskom jeziku (Medicinska i glazba). Članovima je dozvoljeno natjecati se u bilo kojem ili svim podkazama. Ukupno je sudjelovalo ukupno 11 timova, s ukupno 39 različitih sustava podignuta kroz sve podatke. Podaci, rezultati i daljnje informacije o zadatku se nalaze na < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hyperniem Discovery. We hebben deze taak voorgesteld als een complementaire benchmark voor het modelleren van hyperniemie, een probleem dat traditioneel wordt beschouwd als een binaire classificatietaak, waarbij een paar kandidaat-woorden als input worden genomen. In plaats daarvan wordt onze geformuleerde taak als volgt gedefinieerd: als een invoerterm wordt gegeven, haalt (of ontdekt) de geschikte hyperniemen uit een doelcorpus. We hebben vijf verschillende subtaken voorgesteld die drie talen bestrijken (Engels, Spaans en Italiaans), en twee specifieke kennisdomeinen in het Engels (Medisch en Muziek). Deelnemers mochten deelnemen aan een of alle subtaken. Over het algemeen namen elf teams deel, met in totaal 39 verschillende systemen ingediend door alle subtaken. Gegevens, resultaten en verdere informatie over de taak vindt u op < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'ko': '본고는 SemEval 2018의 초자모어 발견에 대한 공유 임무를 소개한다.우리는 이 임무를 보충 기준으로 삼아 초음을 모델링하는 것을 제기했다. 이 문제는 전통적으로 이원 분류 임무로 여겨지고 한 쌍의 후보어를 입력으로 한다.반대로 우리가 다시 제정한 임무는 다음과 같다. 입력 용어를 정하고 목표 어료 라이브러리에서 적합한 초어를 검색하거나 발견한다.우리는 세 가지 언어(영어, 스페인어, 이탈리아어)와 영어의 두 가지 특정 지식 분야(의학과 음악)를 포함하는 다섯 가지 서로 다른 하위 임무를 제시했다.참여자는 모든 하위 임무에서 경쟁할 수 있습니다.전체적으로 11개 팀이 참여했고 모든 하위 임무를 통해 39개의 다른 시스템을 제출했다.이 작업에 대한 데이터, 결과 및 자세한 내용은 <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119>.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ کار مشترک نصف سال ۲۰۱۸ را توصیف می\u200cکند. ما این وظیفه را به عنوان یک نقشه\u200cی اضافه\u200cای برای نمونه\u200cسازی hypernymy پیش فرستادیم، یک مشکل که به طور سنتی به عنوان یک وظیفه\u200cی گروه\u200cسازی دویینی فرستاده شده است، و یک جفت کلمه\u200cی کاندیداتی را به عنوان ورودی به جای این، کار تغییر داده شده\u200cی ما به عنوان این تعریف می\u200cشود: به عنوان مدت ورودی، هیپرنیم\u200cهای مناسب خود را از یک جسد هدف بگیرید. ما پنج زیر آهنگ متفاوت را پیشنهاد کردیم که درباره سه زبان (انگلیسی، اسپانیایی و ایتالیایی) و دو دامنه خاص علم در انگلیسی (پزشکی و موسیقی) است. اجازه داده شد که شرکت کننده\u200cها در هر یا هر زیر خواسته\u200cای رقابت کنند. در کل، جمعیت ۱۱ تیم شرکت کردند، با جمعیت ۳۹ سیستم متفاوتی که از طریق تمام زیر سؤال ها ارائه شده است. اطلاعات، نتایج و اطلاعات بیشتری درباره این کار در < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 .', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 2018-nji ýyldaky Hipernim Discovery barada paylaşyk işini tassyýar. Biz bu zady hipernimi modelletmek üçin complementer takmynan çykyşyk diýipdir. Däpli bärde ikinji klasifikasyon täblisi bolup, kandidatyň çift sözleri girdi diýipdir. Yýene-de, reformatýan zadymyz şol şekilde definlanýar: girdi terimi berildi, özüniň gowy hipernymlaryny bir hedef korpusdan tapdyryn. Biz üç dil (iňlisçe, ispanyýaly we italiýaly) we iňlisçe bilim sistemasynda beş dürli süpjük teklip etdik. Wagtlaýyşyň hiçbiri ýa-da ähli soraglaryň içine çykyp bilmegi rugsat berildi. Hemme üçin 11 topar goşuldy, hemme soraglar bilen üýtgeden 39 farklı sistemalar bar. < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery. Kami mengajukan tugas ini sebagai benchmark komplementari untuk model hipernimi, sebuah masalah yang tradisional telah dilemparkan sebagai tugas klasifikasi binari, mengambil sepasang kata kandidat sebagai input. Sebaliknya, tugas kita yang diubah didefinisikan seperti ini: diberikan istilah masukan, mendapatkan (atau menemukan) hipernim yang sesuai dari tubuh sasaran. Kami mengusulkan lima subtasks yang berbeda meliputi tiga bahasa (Inggris, Spanyol, dan Italia), dan dua bidang khusus pengetahuan dalam bahasa Inggris (Medis dan Musik). Peserta diizinkan untuk bersaing dalam salah satu atau semua subtasks. Secara umum, total 11 tim berpartisipasi, dengan total 39 sistem yang berbeda dihantar melalui semua subtasks. Data, hasil dan informasi lanjut tentang tugas dapat ditemukan di < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery. Wir haben diese Aufgabe als ergänzendes Benchmark für die Modellierung von Hypernymie vorgestellt, ein Problem, das traditionell als binäre Klassifikationsaufgabe betrachtet wird, wobei ein Paar Kandidatenwörter als Eingabe verwendet wird. Stattdessen ist unsere neu formulierte Aufgabe wie folgt definiert: Geben Sie einen Eingabebegriff, rufen Sie seine passenden Hypernyme aus einem Zielkorpus ab (oder entdecken Sie). Wir schlugen fünf verschiedene Teilaufgaben vor, die drei Sprachen (Englisch, Spanisch und Italienisch) und zwei spezifische Wissensbereiche in Englisch (Medizin und Musik) abdecken. Die Teilnehmer durften an einem oder allen Teilaufgaben teilnehmen. Insgesamt nahmen insgesamt elf Teams teil, wobei insgesamt 39 verschiedene Systeme durch alle Teilaufgaben eingereicht wurden. Daten, Ergebnisse und weitere Informationen zur Aufgabe finden Sie unter < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea SemEval 2018 Kushirikiana na kazi ya Hypernym. Tunaweza kufanya kazi hii kama bendera ya kisasa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza hali ya juu, tatizo ambalo kwa kawaida limetumiwa kama jukumu la kutafsiri binafsi, kwa kuchukua maneno mawili ya wagombea kama input. Badala yake, kazi yetu ya mabadiliko inaelezwa kama ifuatavyo: kwa kutumia muhula wa kujiandikisha, kupunguza (au kugundua) matumizi yanayofaa kutoka kwenye makampuni ya lengo. Tulipendekeza majukumu matano tofauti yanayohusu lugha tatu (Kiingereza, Kihispania, na Kiitalia), na maeneo mawili maalum ya maarifa kwa Kiingereza (Madaktari na muziki). Washiriki waliruhusiwa kushindana katika kazi zote au zote. Kwa ujumla, jumla ya timu 11 walishiriki, na jumla ya mifumo 39 tofauti zilizotolewa kupitia kazi zote. Taarifa, matokeo na taarifa zaidi kuhusu kazi inaweza kupatikana kwenye < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'am': "ይህ ገጽ የሴmEval 2018 ስራውን በHypernym Discovery ላይ ያሳያል፡፡ ይህንን ስራ አካባቢ የፊርኒም አካባቢ መስመር ማድረግ እናስቀረዋለን፣ ባሕላዊው ሁለተኛዎች ቃላት እንደ ጥያቄ የሚወስደውን ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በፋንታ፣ የተለየው ስራታችን እንደዚህ የሚታወቀው ነው፡፡ ሦስት ቋንቋዎች (እንግሊዝኛ፣ ስፓኒሽ እና ጣሊያንኛ) እና በንግግሊዝኛ ሁለት የተለየ እውቀት ሀገሮች (ማህበራዊ እና ሙዚቃ) የሚሸፍኑትን አምስት የተለየ ጥያቄዎችን አጋጅተናል፡፡ Participants were allowed to compete in any or all of the subtasks.  በሙሉ 11 ቡድን ተጋጠሙ፣ በሙሉ 39 የተለያዩ ሥርዓቶች በሁሉም ስርዓቶች የተሰጡት ሲስተም ተጋጠሙ፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan SemEval 2018 Task Shared on Hypernym Discovery. Ne e paraqitëm këtë detyrë si një pikë reference komplementare për modelimin e hipernimisë, një problem që tradicionalisht është hedhur si një detyrë klasifikimi binar, duke marrë një çift fjalësh kandidate si input. Në vend të kësaj, detyra jonë e reformuluar është e përcaktuar si follows: duke dhënë një term ë të hyrjes, merrni (ose zbuloni) hipernimet e saj të përshtatshme nga një korpus objektiv. Ne propozuam pesë nënpyetje të ndryshme që mbulojnë tre gjuhë (anglisht, spanjoll dhe italian) dhe dy fusha specifike të njohurive në anglisht (mjekësor dhe muzikë). Pjesëmarrësit u lejuan të konkurojnë në ndonjë apo të gjitha nënpyetjet. Në përgjithësi, morën pjesë 11 ekipe, me një total prej 39 sistemesh të ndryshëm të paraqitur nëpërmjet të gjitha nënpyetjeve. Të dhënat, rezultatet dhe informacione të mëtejshme rreth detyrës mund të gjenden në < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2018'nin Hypernym Discovery haqqında paylaşılmış işləri təsbiq edir. Biz bu işi hipernimi modelləşdirmək üçün çoxlu bir benchmark olaraq təyin etdik. Bu problemi tradisyonal olaraq ikili klasifikasiya görevi olaraq, bir çift kandidat sözlərini daxil etdik. Əvəzində, reform edilmiş işlərimiz belə belə tanımlanır: giriş vaxtı verilən, düzgün hipernimləri bir korpusdan alın. Biz üç dil (İngilizce, İspanyolca və İtalyan) və İngilizce (Medikal və Müzik) elmi iki müxtəlif sahələrini təklif etdik. İtirafçıların hər hansı bir ya da bütün suçlarında yarışmağa izin verildi. Üstündə 11 dəstə birlikdə yer aldı, bütün dəstəklərlə birlikdə 39 müxtəlif sistemlər vardır. Məlumat, sonuçlar və məlumat haqqında daha çox məlumat < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje podijeljeni zadatak za pola Eval 2018 o hipernimu Discovery. Predložili smo ovaj zadatak kao komplementarnu kritiku za modeliranje hipernimi, problem koji je tradicionalno postavljen kao dvojni zadatak klasifikacije, uzimajući par kandidatskih riječi kao ulaz. Umjesto toga, naš reformirani zadatak je definisan kao sljedeći: s obzirom na ulazni izraz, povući (ili otkrivati) odgovarajuće hipernimke iz ciljnog korpusa. Predložili smo pet različitih podataka koji pokrivaju tri jezika (engleski, španjolski i italijanski), i dvije specifične domene znanja na engleskom jeziku (medicinski i muzika). Učesnicima je dozvoljeno natjecati u bilo kojoj ili svim podkazama. Ukupno je sudjelovalo ukupno 11 timova, sa ukupno 39 različitih sustava podignuta kroz sve podatke. Podaci, rezultati i daljnje informacije o zadatku se nalaze na < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 - Da.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি হাইপার্নিম ডিস্কোরিতে শেয়ার করা কাজের ব্যাখ্যা করছে। হাইপারেনিমের মডেল করার জন্য আমরা এই কাজের এক জটিল বেনম্যার্ক হিসেবে তুলে ধরি, একটি সমস্যা, যা ঐতিহ্যবাহীতভাবে বাইনারি শ্রেণীবিভাগের কাজ হিস এর পরিবর্তে আমাদের সংস্কারের কাজ নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে নীচের মত: একটি ইনপুটের মেয়াদ দেয়া হয়েছে, একটি লক্ষ্য কর্পুস থেকে তার যথাযথ হাইপারে আমরা পাঁচ ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন সাবটাজের প্রস্তাব করেছিলাম যারা তিন ভাষায় (ইংরেজী, স্প্যানিশ এবং ইতালিয়ান), আর ইংরেজী ভাষা অংশগ্রহণকারীদের অনুমতি দেয়া হয়েছে যে কোনো সাবটাসে প্রতিযোগিতা করতে। সাধারণত ১১টি দল অংশগ্রহণ করেছে, যার মোট ৩৯টি বিভিন্ন সিস্টেম সকল সাবটাকাজের মাধ্যমে জমা দিয়েছে। Data, results and further information about the task can be found at < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >', 'ca': "Aquest article describe la SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery. Vam presentar aquesta tasca com un punt de referència complementar per modelar l'hipernimi, un problem a que tradicionalment ha estat interpretat com una tasca binaria de classificació, prenent un parell de paraules candidates com entrada. Instead, our reformulated task is defined as follows: given an input term, retrieve (or discover) its suitable hypernyms from a target corpus.  We proposed five different subtasks covering three languages (English, Spanish, and Italian), and two specific domains of knowledge in English (Medical and Music).  Participants were allowed to compete in any or all of the subtasks.  En general, un total de 11 equips van participar, amb un total de 39 sistemes diferents submetits a través de totes les subterrànies. Les dades, els resultats i més informació sobre la tasca es troben a < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2018 ühist ülesannet hüpernüümide avastamisel. Me esitame selle ülesande täiendava võrdlusalusena hüpernüümia modelleerimiseks, probleemi, mis on traditsiooniliselt visatud kui binaarne klassifitseerimisülesanne, võttes sisendina paar kandidaatsõna. Selle asemel määratletakse meie ümberkujundatud ülesanne järgmiselt: sisendtermini korral hankige (või avastage) selle sobivad hüpernüümid sihtkorpusest. Pakkusime välja viis erinevat alamülesannet, mis hõlmavad kolme keelt (inglise, hispaania ja itaalia) ja kaht konkreetset inglise keele teadmiste valdkonda (meditsiin ja muusika). Osalejatel lubati konkureerida ükskõik millises allülesandes või kõigis. Kokku osales 11 meeskonda, millest kõigi allülesannete kaudu esitati 39 erinevat süsteemi. Andmed, tulemused ja täiendav teave ülesande kohta leiate aadressilt < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery. Esitämme tämän tehtävän täydentävänä vertailukohtana mallintamiseen hypernyymiä, ongelma, joka on perinteisesti valettu binääriluokittelutehtävän, ottaen pari ehdokassanaa syötteenä. Sen sijaan uudelleenmuotoiltu tehtävämme määritellään seuraavasti: syötetyllä termillä hae (tai löydä) sen sopivat hypernyymit kohdekorpusesta. Ehdotimme viittä eri alatehtävää, jotka kattavat kolme kieltä (englanti, espanja ja italia) ja kaksi erityistä englannin kielen osaamisaluetta (lääketiede ja musiikki). Osallistujat saivat kilpailla missä tahansa tai kaikissa alitehtävissä. Yhteensä 11 tiimiä osallistui, ja kaikkien alitehtävien kautta lähetettiin 39 erilaista järjestelmää. Tiedot, tulokset ja lisätietoja tehtävästä löytyvät osoitteesta < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje SemEval 2018 Shared Task on Hypernym Discovery. Tento úkol jsme předložili jako doplňkový benchmark pro modelování hypernymie, problém, který byl tradičně obsazen jako binární klasifikační úloha, přičemž jako vstup bereme dvojici kandidátských slov. Místo toho je náš přeformulovaný úkol definován následujícím způsobem: zadáním vstupního termínu získejte (nebo objevte) jeho vhodné hypernymy z cílového korpusu. Navrhli jsme pět různých podúkolů zahrnujících tři jazyky (angličtinu, španělštinu a italštinu) a dvě specifické oblasti znalostí angličtiny (lékařství a hudba). Účastníci byli umožněni soutěžit v některém nebo všech dílčích úkolech. Celkově se zúčastnilo celkem jedenácti týmů, celkem 39 různých systémů předložených prostřednictvím všech dílčích úkolů. Data, výsledky a další informace o úkolu naleznete na < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ 2018"-ի "Հիպերնիմային բացահայտում" հանձնարարությունը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք այս խնդիրը որպես համալրացող համեմատակ հիպերնիմիա մոդելավորման համար, մի խնդիր, որը ավանդական կերպ ընդունվել է որպես երկու դասակարգման խնդիր, ընդունելով երկու թեկնածու բառեր որպես ներմուծք: Փոխարենը, մեր վերաձևավորված առաջադրանքը սահմանվում է հետևյալն է. տվյալ ներմուծման տերմինը, վերցնել (կամ հայտնաբերել) իր համապատասխան հիպերնիմները նպատակային մարմնից: Մենք առաջարկեցինք հինգ տարբեր ենթահարցեր, որոնք ներառում են երեք լեզու (անգլերեն, իսպաներեն և իտալիա) և երկու հատուկ գիտելիքների ոլորտ անգլերենում (բժշկական և երաժշտական): մասնակիցներին թույլ տվեց մրցակցել ցանկացած կամ բոլոր ենթահարցերում: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, 11 թիմ մասնակցել էին, 39 տարբեր համակարգեր ներկայացված բոլոր ենթահարցերի միջոցով: Տվյալները, արդյունքները և ավելի շատ տեղեկատվություն խնդրի մասին կարող եք գտնել https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 ]:', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf die semiEval 2018 deelde taak op Hypernym Discovery. Ons het hierdie taak as 'n komplementaar benchmark voor te stel vir die modellering van hipernimi, 'n probleem wat tradisioneel as 'n binêre klasifikasie taak gegooi is, neem 'n paar kandidate woorde as invoer. In plaas, ons reformeerde taak is gedefinieer soos volgende: gegee 'n invoer term, herhaal (of ontdek) sy geskikte hipernies van 'n doel korpus. Ons het vyf verskillende subtaske voorgestel wat drie tale (Engels, Spaanse en Italiese), en twee spesifieke domene van kennis in Engels (Mediese en Musiek). Deelnaders was toegelaat om in enige of alle ondersoeke te reken. Oorsaak het 'n totaal van 11 teams gedeel, met 'n totaal van 39 verskillende stelsels deur alle subtaske ingestuur. Data, resultate en verdere inligting oor die taak kan gevind word by < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >", 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambaran kelompok seminval 2008 Sampeyan task nang keyboard label We set forward this task as a additional bench for modeting In this room, we Refulated task is defined as sekunds: given an input string, retiene Awak dhéwé ngerayakno tanggal limu nggawe barang telu (Inggal, Spanish, lan italian), lan sak sabanjuré sing ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno Inggris (Balika lan Musik). Ngubah-ngubah sing perusahaan nang pating-pating maneh Punika, akeh lan 11 sing dumateng pamhik, lan akeh liyane atusan kanggo kalaha-karang sistem sing bisa nyimpen ning kompa sing bisa basa. D https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na describe the SemEal 2018 Shared Taimar on Hypernym Discover. We put forward this task as a complementary benchmark for modeling hypernymy, a problem which has traditionally been cast as a binary classification task, taking a pair of candidate words as input.  Kayyansa, aikin da aka kyautata aikinmu na ƙayyade kama da aka sami: Ka sami wani muhula da aka shigar, ka sami (ko ka gane) surori masu daidai daga wata nauyi wanda ke amfani da shi. Mun buɗa shan taskõki dabam-dabam, waɗanda ke rufe harshen uku (Ingiriya, Isbanish, da Italian), da dukkan matsayin ilmi na Ingiriya (Madagaske da Music). An yarda mushirikai su yi jihãdi ga dukkan aikin su ko dukkan wannan. Ga da jumla, jama'a na jama'a 11 sun yi shirin, da jama'a na 39 na'ura dabam-dabam wanda aka saka cikin dukkan aikin. Ana iya gano danne, matsalar da maɓallin aiki a <taga> https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >", 'sk': 'V tem članku je opisano skupno opravilo SemEval 2018 o odkrivanju hipernimov. To nalogo smo predstavili kot dopolnilno referenčno merilo za modeliranje hipernimije, problem, ki se tradicionalno uporablja kot naloga binarne klasifikacije, pri čemer smo kot vhod vzeli par kandidatnih besed. Namesto tega je naše preoblikovano nalogo opredeljeno takole: glede na vhodni izraz pridobite (ali odkrijte) ustrezne hipernimike iz ciljnega korpusa. Predlagali smo pet različnih podnalog, ki zajemajo tri jezike (angleščina, španščina in italijanščina) in dve specifični področji znanja angleščine (medicina in glasba). Udeleženci so lahko tekmovali v kateri koli ali vseh podnalogah. Skupno je sodelovalo 11 ekip, skupaj 39 različnih sistemov, predloženih v vseh podnalogah. Podatki, rezultati in dodatne informacije o opravilu najdete na < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המשימה המשותפת של SemEval 2018 על גילוי היפרנים. אנו מציעים את המשימה הזאת כנקודת רמז תוספת לדוגמא היפרנימיה, בעיה שמסורתית הונחה כמשימה סיווג בינרי, לקחת זוג מילים מועמדים כתוצאה. במקום זאת, המשימה המפורסמת שלנו מוגדרת ככה: בהתחשב במונח הכניסה, להשיג (או לגלות) את היפרנימות המתאימות שלה מקורפוס המטרה. הצענו חמישה תוצאות שונות מכילות שלושה שפות (אנגלית, ספרדית, ואיטלקית), ושני תחומות מידע ספציפיים באנגלית (רפואה ומוזיקה). השתתפים הורשו להתחרות בכל או בכל השאלות. Overall, a total of 11 teams participated, with a total of 39 different systems submitted through all subtasks.  נתונים, תוצאות ומידע נוסף על המשימה אפשר למצוא ב < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་རྒྱ་ནག་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ལོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཆོག འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱས་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་འདི་ཇི་ལྟར་གཏོང་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་སྐད ཞུགས་མི་དགོས་པ་གང་ཡང་ན་subtasks་གང་རུང་ནང་དུ་སྤྲོད་བྱེད་ཆོག་ཡོད། ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ཀྱང་། ཆ་ཚང་གཅིག་གི་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡོམས་ཡོད། རང་གི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་འདུག < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/17119 >'}
{'en': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'ar': 'SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: التقاط السمات التمييزية', 'es': 'Tarea 10 de SemEval-2018: Capturar atributos discriminativos', 'pt': 'SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Capturando Atributos Discriminativos', 'fr': 'SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 10\xa0: Capturer les attributs discriminants', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク10 ：差別的属性の取得', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018 职 10:获判', 'hi': 'Semeval-2018 कार्य 10: भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं पर कब्जा करना', 'ru': 'SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Захват дискриминационных атрибутов', 'ga': 'SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών', 'hu': 'SemEval-2018 feladat 10: diszkriminatív attribútumok rögzítése', 'kk': 'Жарым- Eval- 2018 тапсырма 10: дискриминалды аттрибуттарды түсіру', 'ka': 'SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 10: დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების დაკავშირება', 'mk': 'SemEval-2018 задача 10: Фаќање дискриминативни атрибути', 'it': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Catturare attributi discriminatori', 'lt': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'ms': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'mt': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'ml': 'SemEval- 2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Discriminate Attributes', 'pl': 'SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Przechwytywanie dyskryminacyjnych atrybutów', 'ro': 'SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii', 'sr': 'Zadnji zadatak 10: uhvatiti diskriminativne atribute', 'no': 'SemEval-2018 Oppgåve 10: Hent diskriminate attributt', 'so': 'SemEval-2018 Shaqada 10: Capturing Takriminative Attributes', 'ta': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'si': 'සෙම්වේල්-2018 කාර්ය 10: විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් අල්ලගන්න', 'sv': 'SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Att fånga diskriminerande attribut', 'ur': 'نصف Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۱۰: بحث انگیزی اثریت کاپٹ کرنا', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'vi': 'SemEvull-208 Task 10: Bắt được kha năng giảm tội', 'bg': 'Задача 10: улавяне на дискриминационните атрибути', 'da': 'SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Indfangelse af diskriminatoriske attributter', 'hr': 'Zadnji zadatak 10: uhićenje diskriminativnih atributa', 'nl': 'SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Het vastleggen van discriminerende attributen', 'de': 'SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 10: 구분 속성 캡처', 'fa': 'عملۀ ۱۰ ۲۰۱۸: دستگیر کردن ویژه\u200cهای جدایی', 'id': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif', 'sw': 'SemEval-2018 Kazi 10: Kukamata Vitabu vya Ubaguzi', 'tr': 'Ýeri', 'af': 'SemEval-2018 Opdrag 10: Opneem diskriminatiewe eienskappe', 'sq': 'SemEval-2018 Detyra 10: Kapja e atributeve diskriminuese', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Gözəl 10: Diskriminat Atributları', 'bn': 'SemEval-2018 কাজ ১০: বৈষম্যের বৈষম্যের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Zadnji zadatak 10: uhvatiti diskriminativne atribute', 'et': 'SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 10: Diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamine', 'cs': 'SemEval-2018 Úkol 10: Zachycení diskriminačních atributů', 'ca': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturar atributs discriminatoris', 'fi': 'SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Syrjinnyttävien attribuuttien kaappaaminen', 'jv': 'semi-2008 task 10: Capture', 'sk': 'SemEval-2018 Naloga 10: Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov', 'ha': 'QWebPage', 'he': 'SemEval-2018 משימה 10:', 'bo': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the SemEval 2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes. Participants were asked to identify whether an attribute could help discriminate between two concepts. For example, a successful system should determine that ‘urine’ is a discriminating feature in the word pair ‘kidney’, ‘bone’. The aim of the task is to better evaluate the capabilities of state of the art semantic models, beyond pure semantic similarity. The task attracted submissions from 21 teams, and the best system achieved a 0.75 F1 score.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مهمة SemEval 2018 10 حول التقاط السمات التمييزية. طُلب من المشاركين تحديد ما إذا كانت إحدى السمات يمكن أن تساعد في التمييز بين مفهومين. على سبيل المثال ، يجب أن يحدد النظام الناجح أن "البول" سمة مميزة في كلمة زوج "كلية" ، "عظم". الهدف من المهمة هو تقييم قدرات أحدث النماذج الدلالية بشكل أفضل ، بما يتجاوز التشابه الدلالي الخالص. جذبت المهمة مشاركات من 21 فريقًا ، وحقق النظام الأفضل درجة 0.75 في F1.', 'pt': "Este artigo descreve a Tarefa 10 do SemEval 2018 sobre Captura de Atributos Discriminativos. Os participantes foram solicitados a identificar se um atributo poderia ajudar a discriminar entre dois conceitos. Por exemplo, um sistema bem sucedido deve determinar que 'urina' é uma característica discriminante no par de palavras 'rim', 'osso'. O objetivo da tarefa é avaliar melhor as capacidades dos modelos semânticos de última geração, além da pura similaridade semântica. A tarefa atraiu inscrições de 21 equipes, e o melhor sistema alcançou uma pontuação de 0,75 na F1.", 'fr': "Cet article décrit la tâche 10 de SemEval 2018 sur la capture des attributs discriminants. Les participants ont été invités à déterminer si un attribut pouvait aider à établir une distinction entre deux concepts. Par exemple, un système efficace devrait déterminer que «\xa0urine\xa0» est un élément discriminant dans la paire de mots «\xa0rein\xa0» et «\xa0os\xa0». L'objectif de cette tâche est de mieux évaluer les capacités des modèles sémantiques de pointe, au-delà de la simple similitude sémantique. La tâche a attiré des soumissions de 21 équipes et le meilleur système a obtenu un score de 0,75 en F1.", 'es': 'Este documento describe la Tarea 10 de SemEval 2018 sobre la captura de atributos discriminativos. Se pidió a los participantes que identificaran si un atributo podía ayudar a discriminar entre dos conceptos. Por ejemplo, un sistema exitoso debería determinar que «orina» es un rasgo discriminatorio en el par de palabras «riñón», «hueso». El objetivo de la tarea es evaluar mejor las capacidades de los modelos semánticos más modernos, más allá de la pura similitud semántica. La tarea atrajo la participación de 21 equipos, y el mejor sistema logró una puntuación de 0.75 en F1.', 'ja': 'この論文では、差別的属性の捕捉に関するSemEval 2018タスク10について説明します。参加者は、属性が2つの概念を区別するのに役立つかどうかを特定するよう求められました。たとえば、成功したシステムは、「尿」が「腎臓」、「骨」という単語ペアの識別機能であることを判断する必要があります。タスクの目的は、純粋な意味的類似性を超えて、最先端の意味モデルの能力をよりよく評価することである。このタスクは21チームからの応募を集め、ベストシステムは0.75のF 1スコアを達成した。', 'zh': '本文言SemEval 2018获判10。 参与者定一性之二名。 如尿液单词肾,骨骼之别也。 务在更质见语义模形之能,非徒纯语义相似性也。 引自21团队,至统0.75 F1分。', 'hi': "यह पेपर भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करने पर SemEval 2018 कार्य 10 का वर्णन करता है। प्रतिभागियों को यह पहचानने के लिए कहा गया था कि क्या एक विशेषता दो अवधारणाओं के बीच भेदभाव करने में मदद कर सकती है। उदाहरण के लिए, एक सफल प्रणाली को यह निर्धारित करना चाहिए कि 'मूत्र' शब्द 'किडनी', 'हड्डी' में एक भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषता है। कार्य का उद्देश्य शुद्ध शब्दार्थ समानता से परे, कला शब्दार्थ मॉडल की स्थिति की क्षमताओं का बेहतर मूल्यांकन करना है। कार्य ने 21 टीमों से प्रस्तुतियों को आकर्षित किया, और सर्वश्रेष्ठ प्रणाली ने 0.75 एफ 1 स्कोर हासिल किया।", 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается задача 10 SemEval 2018 по улавливанию дискриминационных признаков. Участникам было предложено определить, может ли тот или иной признак помочь провести различие между двумя понятиями. Например, успешная система должна определить, что «моча» является отличительной особенностью в паре слов «почка», «кость». Цель задачи - лучше оценить возможности современных семантических моделей, помимо чисто семантического сходства. Задание привлекло заявки от 21 команды, а лучшая система достигла 0,75 балла F1.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar Thasc 10 SemEval 2018 maidir le Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil. Iarradh ar rannpháirtithe a aithint an bhféadfadh tréith cuidiú le hidirdhealú a dhéanamh idir dhá choincheap. Mar shampla, ba cheart go gcinnfeadh córas rathúil gur gné idirdhealaitheach é `fual' sa phéire `duáin', `cnámh'. Is é aidhm an taisc meastóireacht níos fearr a dhéanamh ar chumais na múnlaí séimeantaice den scoth, thar chosúlachtaí shéimeantacha íon. Mheall an tasc aighneachtaí ó 21 fhoireann, agus bhain an córas is fearr amach scór 0.75 F1.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 feladat 10 a diszkriminatív attribútumok rögzítéséről. A résztvevőket arra kérték, hogy azonosítsák, hogy egy attribútum segíthet-e a két fogalom közötti megkülönböztetésben. Egy sikeres rendszernek például meg kell határoznia, hogy a "vizelet" megkülönböztető jellemzője a "vese", "csont" szópárban. A feladat célja a korszerű szemantikai modellek képességeinek jobb értékelése, a tiszta szemantikai hasonlóságon túl. A feladat 21 csapat jelentkezett, és a legjobb rendszer 0,75 F1 pontszámot ért el.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την εργασία 10 για την καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών. Ζητήθηκε από τους συμμετέχοντες να προσδιορίσουν αν ένα χαρακτηριστικό θα μπορούσε να βοηθήσει στη διάκριση μεταξύ δύο εννοιών. Για παράδειγμα, ένα επιτυχημένο σύστημα θα πρέπει να καθορίσει ότι τα "ούρα" είναι ένα διακριτικό χαρακτηριστικό στο ζεύγος λέξεων "νεφρός", "οστό". Στόχος του έργου είναι η καλύτερη αξιολόγηση των δυνατοτήτων των σημασιολογικών μοντέλων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, πέρα από την καθαρή σημασιολογική ομοιότητα. Το έργο προσέλκυσε υποβολές από 21 ομάδες και το καλύτερο σύστημα πέτυχε σκορ 0.75 F1.', 'ka': "ეს დოკუმენტი გამოსახულებს SemEval 2018 დავალება 10-ის დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების შესახებ. დაწყვეტილებელი მოთხოვნილი იდენტიფიკაცია, თუ არქტიბი შეუძლია დისკრიმინაცია ორი კონცექტის შორის. მაგალითად, წარმატებული სისტემა უნდა განსაზღვრება, რომ `urine' არის დისკრიმინაციური ფუნქცია სიტყვაში `kidney', `bone'. დავალების მიზეზი არის უფრო მეტად გავამუშავოთ ხელსაწყოთა სემონტიკური მოდელების შესაძლებლობას, რომლებიც უფრო სემონტიკური სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა. პარამეტრები 21 ჯგუფიდან გააკეთებულია და უკეთესი სისტემა გააკეთებულია 0,75 F1 წერტილი.", 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il Task 10 di SemEval 2018 sulla cattura degli attributi discriminatori. Ai partecipanti è stato chiesto di identificare se un attributo potesse aiutare a discriminare tra due concetti. Ad esempio, un sistema di successo dovrebbe determinare che `urina' è una caratteristica discriminante nella parola coppia `rene', `osso'. L'obiettivo del compito è quello di valutare meglio le capacità dei modelli semantici all'avanguardia, al di là della pura somiglianza semantica. Il compito ha attirato contributi da 21 squadre, e il miglior sistema ha ottenuto un punteggio di 0,75 F1.", 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува SemEval 2018 задачата 10 за заземање дискриминативни атрибути. Учесниците беа побарани да идентификуваат дали атрибутот може да помогне во дискриминацијата помеѓу двата концепти. На пример, успешниот систем треба да одреди дека „ урина “ е дискриминативна карактеристика во зборот пар „ бубрег “, „ коска “. Целта на задачата е подобро да се проценат способностите на најновите семантични модели, надвор од чиста семантична сличност. The task attracted submissions from 21 teams, and the best system achieved a 0.75 F1 score.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma 2018 m. pusiau vertinimo 10 užduotis dėl diskriminacinių požymių gavimo. Dalyvių buvo paprašyta nustatyti, ar požymis galėtų padėti diskriminuoti dvi sąvokas. Pavyzdžiui, sėkminga sistema turėtų nustatyti, kad „ šlapimas “ yra diskriminacinė savybė žodžių porai „ inkstai “, „ kaulai “. Šios užduoties tikslas – geriau įvertinti pažangiausių semantinių modelių gebėjimus, be vien semantinio panašumo. Įgyvendinant šią užduotį 21 komanda pateikė paraiškas, o geriausia sistema pasiekė 0,75 F1 rezultatą.', 'kk': "Бұл қағаз дискриминациялық аттрибуттарды түсіру үшін 2018 жылдың 10- жарым тапсырмасын таңдайды. Қатысушыларға екі концепция арасындағы атрибуттың бөлексіздігін анықтауға сұралды. Мысалы, сәтті жүйе `urine' деген 'kidney', `bone' деген сөздің дискриминациялық мүмкіндігін анықтау керек. Тапсырманың мақсаты - суреттің семантикалық үлгілерінің күйінің мүмкіндігін жақсы оқу, таза семантикалық ұқсастығынан артық. Тапсырма 21 топтан жіберілген және ең жақсы жүйе 0,75 F1 нүктесі жеткізді.", 'ms': "This paper describes the SemEval 2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes.  Peserta diminta untuk mengenalpasti sama ada atribut boleh membantu mendiskriminasi antara dua konsep. Contohnya, sistem berjaya patut menentukan bahawa `urine' adalah ciri yang mendiskriminasi dalam perkataan pasangan `ginjal', `tulang'. Tujuan tugas adalah untuk meneliti lebih baik kemampuan model semantik seni, melampaui persamaan semantik murni. Tugas itu menarik penghantaran dari 21 pasukan, dan sistem terbaik mencapai skor 0.75 F1.", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10 ക്യാപ്റ്റന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നത് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. പങ്കാളികള്\u200d രണ്ടു ആശയങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സഹായിക്കുമോ എന്ന് തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ആവശ്യപ For example, a successful system should determine that `urine' is a discriminating feature in the word pair `kidney', `bone'.  ഈ ജോലിയുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം ശുദ്ധ സെമാന്റിക് മോഡലുകളുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ കഴിവിനെക്കുറിച്ച് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനു ശ 21 ടീമില്\u200d നിന്നും ഈ ജോലി സമര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സിസ്റ്റം 0. 75 F1 സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തി.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2018 оны SemEval-ын 10 даалгаварыг хуваалцах талаар тайлбарладаг. Харин оролцогчдыг хоёр ойлголтын ялгааг ялгаалж чадах эсэхийг олж мэдэхээс асуусан. Жишээлбэл, амжилттай систем "шээс" гэдэг нь "бөөр", "яс" гэдэг үгийнхээ хувьд өөрчлөгдөж байгааг тодорхойлж чадна. Үүний зорилго нь урлагийн semantic загварын байр суурь байдлын чадварыг илүү сайн үнэлэх юм. Энэ ажил 21 багийнхаа дамжуулалтыг татаж, хамгийн шилдэг систем 0.75 F1 оноо гарч ирсэн.', 'no': 'Denne papiret skildrar halvEval 2018 oppgåva 10 om å henta diskriminate attributt. Deltakarar ble spurd om å identifisera om ein attributt kan hjelpa til diskriminasjon mellom to konseptar. For eksempel bør ei vellukka systemet bestemme at «urin» er ein diskriminasjonsfunksjon i ordet par «kidney», «bone». Målet på oppgåva er å betre evaluera kapasiteten for kunstsemantiske modeller, utanfor rein semantisk likning. Oppgåva attrakta oppføringar frå 21 grupper, og den beste systemet fikk eit 0,75 F1- poeng.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie Sarcina 10 SemEval 2018 privind capturarea atributelor discriminatorii. Participanților li s-a cerut să identifice dacă un atribut ar putea contribui la discriminarea între două concepte. De exemplu, un sistem de succes ar trebui să determine că "urina" este o caracteristică discriminatorie în cuvântul pereche "rinichi", "os". Scopul sarcinii este de a evalua mai bine capacitățile modelelor semantice de ultimă generație, dincolo de similitudinea semantică pură. Sarcina a atras participații de la 21 de echipe, iar cel mai bun sistem a obținut un scor F1 de 0,75.', 'mt': 'This paper describes the SemEval 2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes.  Il-parteċipanti ntalbu jidentifikaw jekk attribut jistax jgħin fid-diskriminazzjoni bejn żewġ kunċetti. Pereżempju, sistema ta’ suċċess għandha tiddetermina li l-‘awrina’ hija karatteristika diskriminatorja fil-kelma par ‘kliewi’, ‘għadam’. L-għan tal-kompitu huwa li jiġu evalwati aħjar il-kapaċitajiet tal-mudelli semantiċi l-aktar avvanzati, lil hinn minn similarità semantika pura. Il-kompitu ġibed sottomissjonijiet minn 21 tim, u l-a ħjar sistema kisbet punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.75.', 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ සේම්වල් 2018 කාර්ය 10 ක්\u200dරියාව විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් අල්ලගන්න. අංකර්ශකයන්ට අහන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂය දෙකක් අතර විශේෂය කරන්න උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. උදාහරණයෙන්, සාර්ථක පද්ධතියක් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න ඕනේ කියලා `urine' වචනය `කුළුළුල්', `කුළුල්' වචනයේ විශ වැඩේ අලක්ෂණය තමයි කල්ලාගේ සෙමැන්ටික් මොඩේල්ස්ටික් විසින් සාමාන්තික වගේ සාමාන්තික වගේ හැකියාවක් හොඳට අ වැඩේ කණ්ඩායම 21 කණ්ඩායමෙන් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන්, හොඳම පද්ධතිය 0.75 F1 ස්කෝර් එකක් ලැබුනා.", 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje zadanie SemEval 2018 10 dotyczące wychwytywania atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych. Uczestnicy zostali poproszeni o określenie, czy atrybut może pomóc w rozróżnieniu dwóch pojęć. Na przykład, udany system powinien określić, że "mocz" jest cechą dyskryminującą w parze słów "nerka", "kość". Celem zadania jest lepsza ocena możliwości najnowocześniejszych modeli semantycznych, poza czystym semantycznym podobieństwem. Zadanie przyciągnęło zgłoszenia z 21-tych zespołów, a najlepszy system osiągnął wynik 0,75 F1.', 'sv': "Denna uppsats beskriver SemEval 2018 Task 10 om att fånga diskriminerande attribut. Deltagarna uppmanades att identifiera om ett attribut kunde bidra till att skilja mellan två begrepp. Ett framgångsrikt system bör till exempel avgöra att `urin' är en diskriminerande egenskap i ordet par `njure', `ben'. Syftet med uppgiften är att bättre utvärdera kapaciteten hos de senaste semantiska modellerna, bortom ren semantisk likhet. Uppgiften lockade bidrag från 21 lag, och det bästa systemet uppnådde 0,75 F1 poäng.", 'sr': 'Ovaj novinar opisuje zadatak 10 za pola Evala 2018 o kapitanju diskriminativnih atributa. Zamolili su sudionike da identifikuju može li atribut pomoći diskriminaciji između dva koncepta. Na primer, uspešan sistem bi trebao odrediti da je "urin" diskriminirajuća karakteristika reči "bubreg", "kost". Cilj zadatka je bolje proceniti mogućnosti stanja umetnosti semantičkih modela, izvan čiste semantičke sličnosti. Taj zadatak je privukao podatke od 21 tima, a najbolji sistem je postigao 0,75 F1 rezultat.', 'ta': "இந்த தாள் SemEval 2018 செயல் 10 குணங்களை கைப்பற்றும் பற்றி விளக்குகிறது. ஒரு குணங்கள் இரண்டு கருத்துக்களுக்கிடையில் வித்தியாசமாக்க உதவுமா என்று குணங்கள் கேட்கப்பட்டது. உதாரணத்திற்கு, ஒரு வெற்றிகரமான அமைப்பு 'urine' என்பது 'குடும்பு 'எலும்பு' என்ற வார்த்தையில் ஒரு வித்தியாசமான தன்மை இந்த செயலின் குறிப்பு, சுத்தமான பெம்மான்டிக் ஒப்பிற்கு மேல் கலை நிலையின் தன்மையை சிறந்த மதிப்பிட வேண்டும். இந்த செயல் 21 குழுக்களில் இருந்து ஒப்புக்கொள்ளும் ஆச்சரியப்பட்டது, சிறந்த அமைப்பு 0. 75 F1 புள்ளிகள் அடைந்தது.", 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay shaqada SemEval 2018 10 oo ku saabsan karsashada takooridda. Waxaa la weydiiyey dadka ka qeybqaada in la caddeeyo in uu ka caawinayo takoorida labada fikir dhexdooda. Tusaale ahaan nidaam succeeded ah waa in uu caddeeyaa in `urin' uu yahay mid takoorisan hadalka labada keliya `lafo'. Ujeedada shaqadu waa in aad si wanaagsan u qiimeyso awoodda xaalada farshaxanka semantika, iyadoo aan ka badnayn isku mid ah. Shaqada waxaa loo soo bandhigay iskuul 21 koox, nidaamka ugu fiican wuxuu gaadhay score 0.75 F1.", 'ur': "This paper describes the SemEval 2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminate Attributes. حضار کرنے والوں سے پوچھا گیا تھا کہ دونوں نظریں کے درمیان تفریق کا اختلاف کرنے کی مدد کرے یا نہ کرے. مثال، ایک موفق سیسٹم کی تعریف کرنا چاہیے کہ 'urine' کلمہ جفت 'kidney', 'bone' میں ایک جدا جدا جدا کرنے والی ویژہ ہے. اس کام کا مطابق یہ ہے کہ آرتی سیمانٹیکی موڈل کے امکانات کے لحاظ سے زیادہ اچھا ارزش کرنا، پاک سیمانٹیکی برابری کے بعد۔ اور بہترین سیسٹم نے 0.75 F1 اسکور کو پہنچایا۔", 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval 2018 Vazifa 10 tashkilotni olib tashlash mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Masalan, muvaffaqiyatli tizim `urin', `bon' soʻzdagi soʻzni ajratish imkoniyatini aniqlash kerak. Vazifa maqsadi, sanam semantik modellarining imkoniyatini yaxshi qiymatish, safar semantik bir xil kabi. Vazifa 21 guruhdan imkoniyatlarni ko'rsatadi, eng yaxshi tizim 0.75 F1 scorga yetdi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả Nhiệm vụ của SemEvol 208 về Việc chụp những thuộc tính giảm tội. Người tham gia được yêu cầu xác định xem một biểu tượng có thể giúp phân biệt hai khái niệm hay không. Ví dụ, một hệ thống thành công sẽ xác định rằng "nước tiểu" là một tính năng phân biệt trong từ cặp "thận", "xương". Nhiệm vụ này nhằm mục đích là đánh giá tốt hơn khả năng của các mô hình ngữ pháp nghệ thuật hiện đại, ngoài sự giống nhau đơn thuần. Nhiệm vụ thu thập các đơn vị của 21, và hệ thống tốt nhất đạt được ghi số 0.75 F1.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва задача 10 за улавяне на дискриминационни атрибути. Участниците бяха помолени да идентифицират дали даден атрибут може да помогне за дискриминацията между две понятия. Например успешната система трябва да определи, че "урината" е отличителна характеристика в думата двойка "бъбрек", "кост". Целта на задачата е да се оценят по-добре възможностите на съвременните семантични модели, отвъд чистата семантична прилика. Задачата привлече кандидати от 21 отбора, а най-добрата система постигна 0,75 точки във Формула 1.', 'hr': "Ovaj novinar opisuje zadatak 10 iz polovine ispitivanja 2018. Zamolili su učesnike da identifikuju može li atribut pomoći diskriminirati između dva koncepta. Na primjer, uspješan sustav bi trebao utvrditi da je 'urin' diskriminirajuća karakteristika riječi par 'bubrega', 'kost'. Cilj zadatka je bolje procijeniti mogućnosti stanja umjetničkih semantičkih modela, izvan čiste semantičke sličnosti. Zadatak je privukao podatke od 21 tima, a najbolji sustav je postigao 0,75 F1 rezultat.", 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver SemEval 2018 Opgave 10 om at fange diskriminerende attributter. Deltagerne blev bedt om at identificere, om en attribut kunne bidrage til at skelne mellem to begreber. For eksempel bør et vellykket system bestemme, at `urin' er en diskriminerende funktion i ordet par `nyre', `knogle'. Formålet med opgaven er bedre at evaluere kapaciteterne i state of te art semantiske modeller ud over ren semantisk lighed. Opgaven tiltrak indsendelser fra 21 hold, og det bedste system opnåede en 0,75 F1 score.", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die SemEval 2018 Task 10 zur Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute. Die Teilnehmer wurden gebeten herauszufinden, ob ein Attribut helfen könnte, zwischen zwei Konzepten zu unterscheiden. Ein erfolgreiches System sollte beispielsweise feststellen, dass Urin ein Unterscheidungsmerkmal im Wortpaar Nieren, "Knochen" ist. Ziel der Aufgabe ist es, über die reine semantische Ähnlichkeit hinausgehende Fähigkeiten moderner semantischer Modelle besser zu bewerten. Die Aufgabe zog Einreichungen von 21-Teams an, und das beste System erzielte eine 0,75 F1-Punktzahl.', 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan SemEval 2018 Tugas 10 untuk menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif. Participants were asked to identify whether an attribute could help discriminate between two concepts.  Contohnya, sistem yang berhasil harus menentukan bahwa 'urine' adalah fitur diskriminasi dalam kata pasangan 'ginjal', 'tulang'. Tujuan tugas adalah untuk mengevaluasi lebih baik kemampuan Model semantis seni, diluar kesamaan semantis murni. Tugas itu menarik pengiriman dari 21 tim, dan sistem terbaik mencapai skor 0,75 F1.", 'ko': "본고는 SemEval 2018 임무 10에서 감별 속성 획득에 관한 내용을 소개한다.참여자들은 하나의 속성이 두 개념을 구분하는 데 도움이 되는지 확인해야 한다.예를 들어 성공적인 시스템은'오줌'이'신장'과'뼈'라는 두 단어 쌍의 차이 특징을 확정해야 한다.이 임무의 목적은 순수한 의미의 유사성뿐만 아니라 가장 선진적인 의미 모델의 능력을 더욱 잘 평가하는 것이다.이 임무는 21개 팀의 참가자를 끌어들였고, 최고 시스템의 F1 성적은 0.75점이었다.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ دستور ۱۰ تابع نیمه سال ۲۰۰۸ را توصیف می\u200cکند. شرکتگران خواسته شد که مشخص کنند آیا یک ویژه می\u200cتواند کمک کند که بین دو فرضیه جدا شود. برای مثال، یک سیستم موفقیت باید تصمیم بگیرد که «urine» یک ویژه جدا کننده در کلمه جفت «کلیه», «استخوان» است. هدف این وظیفه این است که توانایی وضعیت مدل های semantic هنری را بیشتر از شباهت semantic پاک ارزیابی کنیم. این وظیفه تحویل از ۲۱ تیم را جذب کرد و بهترین سیستم یک امتیاز ۱.۷۵ اف ۱ را رسید.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz 2018-nji SemEval Taýgyzyny 10-nji Taýgyzyny Taýýarlamak üçin tassyýar. Saýlanan çykyşlyklar üçin bir atribut iki düşünjüň arasynda aýratmagy kömek edip bilmeýändigini tanap sorady. mysal, başarnykly bir sistem `urin', 'böbrek', `kemik' sözlerinde diskrimi çykarýan özelliklerdir. Gözmeniň maksady - sanat semantik nusgalarynyň durumyny gowy çykmak, täze semantik meňzeşlikden öňünde. Görev 21 topardan süýşiklikleri çekdi we iň gowy sistemasyň 0.75 F1 अंदर bardy.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea kazi 10 ya SemEval 2018 kuhusu Kukamata Tamko za Ubaguzi. Washiriki waliulizwa kutambua kama kifaa kinaweza kusaidia kubagua kati ya dhana mbili. Kwa mfano, mfumo wa mafanikio unapaswa kufanikiwa kua ‘sura’ ni utambulisho wa kutenganisha katika neno la neno “Nyenya”, “mifupa”. Lengo la kazi ni kutathmini uwezo wa hali ya mifano ya sanaa, zaidi ya usawa wa kimapenzi safi. Kazi hiyo ilivutia ujumbe kutoka timu 21, na mfumo bora ulifikia score 0.75 F1.', 'nl': "Dit artikel beschrijft de SemEval 2018 Task 10 over het vastleggen van discriminerende attributen. Deelnemers werden gevraagd na te gaan of een attribuut kan helpen onderscheid te maken tussen twee concepten. Een succesvol systeem zou bijvoorbeeld moeten bepalen dat 'urine' een onderscheidend kenmerk is in het woordpaar 'nier', 'bot'. Het doel van de taak is om de mogelijkheden van state of the art semantische modellen beter te evalueren, voorbij pure semantische gelijkenis. De taak trok inzendingen van 21-teams aan en het beste systeem behaalde een 0.75 F1 score.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die semiEval 2018 taak 10 op die beskrywing van diskriminatiewe eienskappe. Deelnaders word gevra om te identifiseer of 'n eienskap tussen twee konsepte kan help diskrimineer. Byvoorbeeld, moet 'n suksesvol stelsel bepaal dat `urin'  'n diskrimineering funksie in die woord paar `niere', `bene' is. Die doel van die taak is om die moontlikhede van die staat van die kuns semantiese modele beter te evalueer, buite suiwer semantiese gelykenis. Die opdrag het voorgetrek van 21 teams, en die beste stelsel het 'n 0.75 F1 punt bereik.", 'sq': "Ky dokument përshkruan SemEval 2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes. Pjesëmarrësit u kërkuan të identifikojnë nëse një atributë mund të ndihmojë në diskriminimin midis dy koncepteve. Për shembull, një sistem i suksesshëm duhet të përcaktojë se `urinë' është një karakteristikë diskriminuese në fjalën çift `veshkë', `kockë'.. The aim of the task is to better evaluate the capabilities of state of the art semantic models, beyond pure semantic similarity.  Detyra tërhoqi paraqitje nga 21 ekipe dhe sistemi më i mirë arriti një rezultat 0.75 F1.", 'am': "ይህ ገጽ የSemEval 2018 ስራ 10 በማቀናኘት የጥያቄ ምርጫዎችን ይናገራል፡፡ ተጋሪዎቹ በሁለቱ አሳቤዎች መካከል እንዲለይ የሚችል መሆኑን እንዲያውቁ ይጠይቃሉ። ለምሳሌ፣ የድል ስርዓት ``ውሃ'``አጥን› በሚል ቃላት ሁለት ዓይነቶች `ኬዲስ'፣ የሚያስተናክል ምርጫዎች መሆኑን ማረጋገጥ ይገባዋል፡፡ የስራው ግንኙነት ከንጹሕ ምሳሌ በላይ የዓርስተ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካላዊውን በማስተዋል ነው፡፡ ሥርዓቱ ከ21 ቡድን ውጤቶችን አቀማጠለ፣ የተሻለ ሲስተም 0.75 F1 score አግኝቷል፡፡", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ 2018"-ի "Դիսկրմինատիվ առանձնահատկությունների բռնումը" 10-ը: մասնակիցներին խնդրեցին պարզել, թե արդյոք առանձնահատկությունը կարող է օգնել երկու գաղափարի միջև տարբերակել: Օրինակ, հաջողակ համակարգը պետք է որոշեր, որ «ուշը» տարբերակող հատկություն է «երիկա», «ոսկորի» բառի զույգը: Այս խնդիրը նպատակն է ավելի լավ գնահատել արվեստի սեմանտիկ մոդելների հնարավորությունները, առանց մաքուր սեմանտիկ նմանության: Այս խնդիրը գրավեց 21 թիմի ներկայացումներ, և լավագույն համակարգը հասավ 0.75 F1 գնահատման:', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la tasca 10 de SemEval 2018 sobre capturar atributs discriminatoris. Participants were asked to identify whether an attribute could help discriminate between two concepts.  Per exemple, un sistema d'èxit hauria de determinar que l'orina és una característica discriminatoria en la paraula parell de ronyons, os. L'objectiu de la tasca és valorar millor les capacitats dels models semàntics d'última generació, més enllà de la pura similitud semàntica. La tasca va atrair presentacions de 21 equips, i el millor sistema va aconseguir una puntuació de 0,75 F1.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje SemEval 2018 Task 10 na zachycení diskriminačních atributů. Účastníci byli požádáni, aby určili, zda by atribut mohl pomoci rozlišovat dva pojmy. Například úspěšný systém by měl určit, že "moč" je rozlišující rys ve slovním páru "ledvina", "kost". Cílem této práce je lépe zhodnotit schopnosti nejmodernějších sémantických modelů nad rámec čisté sémantické podobnosti. Úkol přilákal příspěvky 21-týmů a nejlepší systém dosáhl 0,75 F1 skóre.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2018. aasta ülesannet 10 diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamise kohta. Osalejatel paluti teha kindlaks, kas atribuut võib aidata eristada kahte mõistet. Näiteks peaks edukas süsteem kindlaks tegema, et uriin on sõnapaari "neer", "luu" eristav tunnusjoon. Ülesande eesmärk on paremini hinnata kaasaegsete semantiliste mudelite võimekust, väljaspool puhast semantilist sarnasust. Ülesandel osales 21 meeskonda ja parim süsteem saavutas 0,75 F1 skoori.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes. Osallistujia pyydettiin selvittämään, voisiko jokin ominaisuus auttaa erottamaan toisistaan kaksi käsitettä. Esimerkiksi onnistuneen järjestelmän tulisi määrittää, että virtsa on erotteleva piirre sanaparissa munuainen eli luu. Työn tavoitteena on arvioida paremmin uusimpien semanttisten mallien mahdollisuuksia puhtaan semanttisen samankaltaisuuden lisäksi. Tehtävään osallistui 21 joukkuetta, ja paras järjestelmä saavutti 0,75 F1 pisteen.', 'bn': "এই পত্রিকা সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজের ১০ কাজ ক্যাপ্টেনিং বৈষম্যিক বৈষম্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী নিয়ে বর্ণনা করেছে। অংশগ্রহণকারীদের জিজ্ঞাসা করা হয়েছিল যে একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য দুই ধারণার মধ্যে বৈষম্য করতে সাহায্য করবে কিনা। উদাহরণস্বরূপ, একটি সফল সিস্টেম নির্ধারণ করা উচিত যে 'পুরুষ' একটি বৈষম্যিক বৈষম্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য `কিডনি', `হাড়ি' শব্দের মধ্যে  কাজের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে শিল্পী সেম্যান্টিক মডেলের অবস্থার ক্ষমতা ভালোভাবে মূল্যায়ন করার জন্য, সেমান্টিক সমতার বাইরে। এই কাজটি ২১ দলের কাছ থেকে আকর্ষণ করেছে এবং সেরা সিস্টেম ০. ৭৫ এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে।", 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt 2018-ci SemEval Task 10-ini Diskriminat AttributlarńĪnńĪ YaŇüamaq haqqńĪnda t…ôsbiq edir. ńįki fikirl…ôr arasńĪnda ayńĪrmańüa k√∂m…ôk ed…ô bil…ôc…ôyini t…ôŇükil etm…ôk ist…ôdil…ôr. Misal olaraq, baŇüarńĪlńĪ bir sistem "urin" iki "b√∂brek", "s√ľm√ľk" kelimesind…ô m√ľxt…ôlif bir √∂zellikdir. Bu iŇüin m…ôqs…ôdi, sanat semantik modell…ôrin v…ôziyy…ôtini daha yaxŇüńĪ deńüerl…ôŇüdirm…ôkdir. G√∂z…ôl 21 d…ôst…ôd…ôn t…ôklif edildi v…ô …ôn yaxŇüńĪ sistem 0,75 F1 n√∂qt…ôsin…ô √ßatdńĪ.', 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje zadatak 10 iz polovice 2018 o kapitanju diskriminativnih atributa. Zamolili su sudionike da identifikuju može li atribut pomoći diskriminirati između dva koncepta. Na primjer, uspješan sistem bi trebao utvrditi da je 'urin' diskriminirajuća karakteristika riječi par 'bubrega', 'kost'. Cilj zadatka je bolje procijeniti mogućnosti stanja umjetničkih semantičkih modela, izvan čiste semantičke sličnosti. Taj zadatak je privukao podatke od 21 tima, a najbolji sistem je postigao 0,75 F1 rezultat.", 'jv': 'This paper describes the seminval 2008 task 10 on Capture Diskrim nated Attribute. Workspace sample Rayakno ning task punika dipunangé kuwi nggawe kapasitekan karo sistem semanti kuwi duluran, kuwi supoyo semanti kuwi duluran. Ombudhakan iku, nggunakake tresnaning sapa Yupun tamah, lan sistem sing luwih apik sing seperakan ning acara 0.75 F1.', 'sk': "V tem članku je opisana naloga 10 SemEval 2018 o zajemanju diskriminativnih atributov. Udeleženci so bili pozvani, naj ugotovijo, ali lahko atribut pomaga pri razlikovanju med dvema konceptoma. Uspešen sistem mora na primer določiti, da je ‚urin' diskriminacijska značilnost v besednem paru ‚ledvica', ‚kost'. Cilj naloge je bolje oceniti zmožnosti najsodobnejših semantičnih modelov, ki presegajo čisto semantično podobnost. Naloga je privabila prispevke 21 ekip, najboljši sistem pa je dosegel rezultat 0,75 F1.", 'ha': "Wannan takardan na describe the SemEal 2018 Tafiyar 10 on kãmurin DiscDiscerninative Attitus. An tambayi mushirikai dõmin a gane cewa wani halin zai iya taimako a tsakanin zato biyu. Misali, wani na kasa mai cin nasara ya ƙayyade cewa`urin' wani abu mai rarraba cikin kalmar `kidney', `ƙasũsa'. Yaƙin aikin ni ne dõmin ka kangara awon halin na musamman na sanam, baka da sifanti mai tsari. Kayan aikin ya attract wasiyyar daga jama'a 21, kuma mafi kyaun na'ura ya sami score 0.75F1.", 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དེ་རྗེས་སུ་འཇུག་བྱས་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་འགོད་སྐྱོང་༡༠ ཞུགས་མི་མང་གིས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཅིག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གང་འདྲ་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་ནམ། དཔེར་ན། མཐར་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་གིས་ `urine'དེ་གསལ་བཀོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཤིག་རེད། བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་བ་semantic མིག་ཆས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཕར་རྟགས་ལྡན་དང་། བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་ཚོ་ཕྱི་ཁམས་21ཡིས་མཉམ་ལས་ཕར་ཞིབ་བྱས་ཡོད། མ་ལག་གི་རིམ་ཤིག་ཚད་0.75 F1 ཡིག་ཚད་ལེན་ཡོད།", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את משימה "חצי ערך 2018" 10 על תפיסת תוויות דיסקרמינציונליות. השתתפים נבקשו לזהות אם תכונה יכולה לעזור להפריע בין שתי מושג. לדוגמה, מערכת מצליחה צריכה לקבוע כי \'שתן\' הוא תכונה מבחינה במילה זוג \'כליה\', \'עצם\'. המטרה של המשימה היא להעריך טוב יותר את היכולות של מודלים סמנטיים של מצב האומנות, מעבר לדמיון סמנטי טהור. המשימה נמשכה משימות מ-21 קבוצות, והמערכת הטובה ביותר השיגה נקודת F1 0.75.'}
{'en': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11 : Machine Comprehension Using Commonsense Knowledge', 'es': 'Tarea 11 del SemEval-2018: Comprensión de máquinas mediante el conocimiento de sentido común', 'fr': "SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 11\xa0: Compréhension automatique à l'aide des connaissances de bon sens", 'ar': 'SemEval-2018 المهمة 11: فهم الآلة باستخدام المعرفة المشاع', 'pt': 'Tarefa 11 do SemEval-2018: Compreensão da máquina usando o conhecimento do senso comum', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务11:用常识之机器解', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク11 ：コモンセンス知識を使用した機械理解', 'ru': 'SemEval-2018 Задача 11: Понимание машины с использованием знаний здравого смысла', 'hi': 'Semeval-2018 कार्य 11: सामान्य ज्ञान का उपयोग करके मशीन समझ', 'ga': 'SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Tuiscint Inneall ag Úsáid Eolas Commonsense', 'hu': 'SemEval-2018 11. feladat: Gépi megértés a Commonsense Knowledge felhasználásával', 'el': 'Εργασία 11: Κατανόηση μηχανών χρησιμοποιώντας τη γνώση κοινής λογικής', 'kk': 'SemEval-2018 Тапсырма 11: Машин қиындығы Commonsense білімін қолдану', 'ka': 'SemEval-2018 დავალება 11: მაქინის კომპრენცია გამოყენება', 'mk': 'SemEval-2018 задача 11: Разбирање на машините користејќи заедничко знаење', 'it': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11: Comprensione della macchina utilizzando la conoscenza del Commonsense', 'mt': 'SemEval-2018 Kompitu 11: Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju bl-Użu ta’ Għarfien Komuni', 'lt': '2018 m. pusmetis 11 uždavinys: Mašinų suvokimas naudojant bendrąsias žinias', 'ms': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Pemahaman Mesin Menggunakan pengetahuan umum', 'no': 'SemEval-2018 Oppgåve 11: Machine Comprehension Bruk Commonsense Knowledge', 'ml': 'സെമ്', 'ro': 'SemEval-2018 Sarcina 11: Înțelegerea mașinilor folosind cunoștințele de bun simț', 'sr': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11: Mašinska kompresija korištenja znanja Commonsense', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Using Commonsense Knowledge', 'pl': 'SemEval-2018 Zadanie 11: Zrozumienie maszyn z wykorzystaniem wiedzy powszechnego sensu', 'sv': 'SemEval-2018 Uppgift 11: Maskinförståelse med hjälp av allmännyttig kunskap', 'si': 'සෙම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 11: මැෂින් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණ දැනගන්න', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Using Commonsense Knowledge', 'so': 'SemEval-2018 Shaqada 11: Heshiiska mashiinka ee isticmaalka aqoonta xirfadda', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 11: Machine Completion Using Commonce Knowledge', 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ bắt đầu 1:', 'bg': 'Задача 11: Разбиране на машината с помощта на общоприето знание', 'da': 'SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Maskinforståelse ved hjælp af almindelig viden', 'hr': 'SemEval-2018 zadatak 11: kompresija za stroj korištenje znanja Commonsense', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 퀘스트 11: 상식지식으로 기계 이해하기', 'id': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Kompresi Mesin Menggunakan Pengetahuan Komunis', 'sw': 'SemEval-2018 Kazi 11: Utumiaji wa Ujumbe wa Mashine', 'nl': 'SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Machine Begrijpen met behulp van Commonsense Kennis', 'de': 'SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 11: Maschinenverständnis unter Verwendung von Commonsense Knowledge', 'af': 'SemEval-2018 Opdrag 11: Masjienkomprehensie gebruik Commonsense kennis', 'fa': 'ماشین ۱۱: تأثیر ماشین استفاده از دانش کمونس ۲۰۱۸', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 11: Machine Comprehension using Commons Knowledge', 'sq': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Using Common Knowledge', 'tr': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Using Commonsense Knowledge', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11', 'hy': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Using Commonsense Knowledge', 'bs': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11: Mašinska kompresija korištenja znanja Commonsense', 'ca': 'SemEval-2018 Tarefa 11: Comprensió de màquines utilitzant coneixements comuns', 'cs': 'SemEval-2018 Úkol 11: Porozumění strojů s využitím obecných znalostí', 'et': 'SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 11: Masina mõistmine, kasutades üldteadmisi', 'fi': 'SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 11: Koneen ymmärtäminen käyttämällä yleistä tietämystä', 'bn': 'SemEval- 2018 কাজ ১১: কমানসেন্সের জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে মেশিন সম্পূর্ণ', 'ha': 'QWebPage', 'sk': 'SemEval-2018 Naloga 11: Razumevanje strojev z uporabo splošnega znanja', 'he': 'SemEval-2018 משימה 11: בינה מכונת בשימוש ידע משותף', 'jv': 'semi-2008 task 11', 'bo': 'SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Using Commonsense Knowledge'}
{'en': 'This report summarizes the results of the SemEval 2018 task on machine comprehension using commonsense knowledge. For this machine comprehension task, we created a new corpus, MCScript. It contains a high number of questions that require commonsense knowledge for finding the correct answer. 11 teams from 4 different countries participated in this shared task, most of them used neural approaches. The best performing system achieves an accuracy of 83.95 %, outperforming the baselines by a large margin, but still far from the human upper bound, which was found to be at 98 %.', 'es': 'Este informe resume los resultados de la tarea SemEval 2018 sobre comprensión de máquinas utilizando el conocimiento de sentido común. Para esta tarea de comprensión de máquinas, creamos un nuevo corpus, MCScript. Contiene un gran número de preguntas que requieren conocimientos de sentido común para encontrar la respuesta correcta. En esta tarea compartida participaron 11 equipos de 4 países diferentes, la mayoría de ellos utilizaron enfoques neuronales. El sistema con mejor rendimiento logra una precisión del 83,95%, superando a las líneas de base por un amplio margen, pero aún lejos del límite superior humano, que se encontró que estaba en el 98%.', 'ar': 'يلخص هذا التقرير نتائج مهمة SemEval 2018 حول الفهم الآلي باستخدام المعرفة المنطقية. بالنسبة لمهمة فهم الآلة هذه ، أنشأنا مجموعة جديدة ، MCScript. يحتوي على عدد كبير من الأسئلة التي تتطلب معرفة منطقية للعثور على الإجابة الصحيحة. شارك 11 فريقًا من 4 دول مختلفة في هذه المهمة المشتركة ، استخدم معظمهم الأساليب العصبية. يحقق النظام الأفضل أداءً دقة تصل إلى 83.95٪ ، متفوقًا على خطوط الأساس بهامش كبير ، لكنه لا يزال بعيدًا عن الحد الأعلى للإنسان ، والذي وجد عند 98٪.', 'fr': "Ce rapport résume les résultats de la tâche SemEval 2018 sur la compréhension des machines à l'aide de connaissances de bon sens. Pour cette tâche de compréhension automatique, nous avons créé un nouveau corpus, McScript. Il contient un grand nombre de questions qui nécessitent des connaissances de bon sens pour trouver la bonne réponse. 11 équipes de 4 pays différents ont participé à cette tâche commune, la plupart utilisant des approches neuronales. Le système le plus performant atteint une précision de 83,95\xa0%, surpassant largement les lignes de base, mais toujours loin de la limite supérieure humaine, qui se situe à 98\xa0%.", 'pt': 'Este relatório resume os resultados da tarefa SemEval 2018 sobre compreensão de máquina usando o conhecimento do senso comum. Para esta tarefa de compreensão de máquina, criamos um novo corpus, MCScript. Ele contém um grande número de perguntas que exigem conhecimento de bom senso para encontrar a resposta correta. 11 equipes de 4 países diferentes participaram desta tarefa compartilhada, a maioria delas usando abordagens neurais. O sistema de melhor desempenho atinge uma precisão de 83,95%, superando as linhas de base por uma grande margem, mas ainda longe do limite superior humano, que foi encontrado em 98%.', 'ja': 'このレポートは、共通知識を使用した機械理解に関するSemEval 2018タスクの結果をまとめたものです。この機械理解タスクのために、私たちは新しいコーパス、MCScriptを作成しました。正しい答えを見つけるために常識的な知識が必要な多くの質問が含まれています。4つの異なる国の11のチームがこの共有タスクに参加し、そのほとんどがニューラルアプローチを使用しました。最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するシステムは、ベースラインを大幅に上回る83.95 ％の精度を達成しますが、それでも98 ％であることが判明した人間の上限からはかなり離れています。', 'zh': '本告总结SemEval 2018年用常识机器解事之效也。 此机器解事,创一新语料库,MCScript。 含大须常识,方能得正对。 自4异国11团队与此共同任务,多用神经法。 至善之统成83.95%之准确率,比基线高一体,犹远下于人上限,即98%也。', 'hi': 'यह रिपोर्ट सामान्य ज्ञान का उपयोग करके मशीन समझ पर SemEval 2018 कार्य के परिणामों को सारांशित करती है। इस मशीन समझ कार्य के लिए, हमने एक नया कॉर्पस, MCScript बनाया। इसमें प्रश्नों की एक उच्च संख्या होती है जिसे सही उत्तर खोजने के लिए सामान्य ज्ञान की आवश्यकता होती है। इस साझा कार्य में 4 अलग-अलग देशों की 11 टीमों ने भाग लिया, उनमें से अधिकांश ने तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग किया। सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाली प्रणाली 83.95% की सटीकता प्राप्त करती है, जो बेसलाइन को एक बड़े मार्जिन से आगे बढ़ाती है, लेकिन अभी भी मानव ऊपरी बाउंड से बहुत दूर है, जो 98% पर पाई गई थी।', 'ru': 'В этом отчете обобщаются результаты задачи SemEval 2018 по пониманию машины с использованием знаний здравого смысла. Для этой задачи машинного понимания мы создали новый корпус, MCScript. В этой совместной задаче приняли участие 11 команд из 4 разных стран, большинство из которых использовали нейронные подходы. Наилучшая работающая система достигает точности 83,95%, опередив базовые линии с большим запасом, но все еще далеко от верхней границы человека, которая, как было установлено, составляет 98%.', 'ga': 'Déanann an tuarascáil seo achoimre ar thorthaí thasc SemEval 2018 ar thuiscint meaisín ag baint úsáide as eolas ciallmhar. Don tasc tuisceana meaisín seo, chruthaíomar corpas nua, MCScript. Tá líon ard ceisteanna ann a éilíonn eolas ciallmhar chun an freagra ceart a fháil. Ghlac 11 fhoireann ó 4 thír dhifriúla páirt sa tasc roinnte seo, agus bhain an chuid is mó acu úsáid as cur chuige néarúil. Baineann an córas feidhmíochta is fearr amach cruinneas 83.95%, rud a sháraíonn na bunlínte le corrlach mór, ach fós i bhfad ó theorainn uachtair an duine, a fuarthas a bheith ag 98%.', 'ka': 'ამ შეტყობინებაში SemEval 2018-ის მოვლენების შესახებ მაქანის გაგრძნობის შესახებ გამოიყენება. ამ მაქინის შესახებ დავასრულება, ჩვენ შექმნა ახალი კორპუს, MCScript. მას აქვს უფრო მეტი კითხვები, რომლებიც უნდა იცოდნენ საზოგადოებო ცნობიერება მარტივი პასუხის ძებნა. 4 განსხვავებული ქვეყნებიდან 11 ჯგუფი მოთავსებულია ამ საზოგადომი დავალებაში, მათგან უფრო მეტი ნეიროლური დახმარების გამოყენება. უკეთესი გავაკეთებული სისტემა მიიღება 83,95%-ის წესიერება, რომელიც უფრო დიდი მარტინით გავაკეთება ბაზის ხაზები, მაგრამ უფრო დიდ მარტინით, მაგრამ ადამიანის მარტივი მარტივი', 'hu': 'Ez a jelentés összefoglalja a SemEval 2018 gépi megértéssel kapcsolatos feladatának eredményeit a közérzeti ismeretek felhasználásával. Ehhez a gépi megértési feladathoz létrehoztunk egy új korpuszt, az MCScript-et. Nagy számú kérdést tartalmaz, amelyek a helyes válasz megtalálásához közértelmes ismereteket igényelnek. Ebben a közös feladatban 4 különböző országból 11 csapat vett részt, többségük neurális megközelítéseket alkalmazott. A legjobb teljesítményű rendszer 83,95%-os pontosságot ér el, nagy mértékben felülmúlja az alapvonalakat, de még mindig messze az emberi felső határtól, amely 98%-os volt.', 'kk': 'Бұл хабарлама 2018 жылдың SemEval тапсырмасының нәтижесін машинаның түсініктері көпшілікті мәліметтерді қолданып жазылады. Бұл компьютердің түсіну тапсырмасы үшін біз жаңа корпус, MCScript жасадық. Ол дұрыс жауап табу үшін көпшілік білім керек сұрақтардың көп саны бар. 4 әртүрлі елден 11 команда бұл ортақтастырылған тапсырманың көпшілігі невралдық түрінде қолданылды. Ең жақсы істеу жүйесі 83,95% деген дұрыс жеткізеді, негізгі сызықтарды үлкен шектеу арқылы, бірақ адамның жоғары шектеу арқылы, ол 98% деген болды.', 'mk': 'Овој извештај ги сумира резултатите од задачата SemEval 2018 за машинско разбирање користејќи заедничко знаење. За оваа задача за машинско разбирање, создадовме нов корпус, MCScript. Содржи голем број прашања кои бараат заедничко знаење за да се најде вистинскиот одговор. 11 тимови од 4 различни земји учествуваа во оваа заедничка задача, повеќето од нив користеа нервни пристапи. Најдобар систем постигнува прецизност од 83,95 отсто, надминувајќи ги основните линии со голема маргина, но сé уште далеку од човечката горна граница, која беше пронајдена на 98 отсто.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα έκθεση συνοψίζει τα αποτελέσματα της εργασίας σχετικά με την κατανόηση μηχανών χρησιμοποιώντας γνώση κοινής λογικής. Για αυτή την εργασία κατανόησης μηχανών δημιουργήσαμε ένα νέο σώμα, το MCScript. Περιέχει έναν υψηλό αριθμό ερωτήσεων που απαιτούν γνώση κοινής λογικής για την εύρεση της σωστής απάντησης. 11 ομάδες από τέσσερις διαφορετικές χώρες συμμετείχαν σε αυτό το κοινό έργο, οι περισσότερες από αυτές χρησιμοποίησαν νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις. Το σύστημα με την καλύτερη απόδοση επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 83,95%, ξεπερνώντας τις γραμμές βάσης κατά μεγάλο περιθώριο, αλλά ακόμα μακριά από το ανθρώπινο ανώτερο όριο, το οποίο διαπιστώθηκε ότι είναι στα 98%.', 'it': "Questo rapporto riassume i risultati del compito SemEval 2018 sulla comprensione delle macchine utilizzando conoscenze di buon senso. Per questo compito di comprensione della macchina, abbiamo creato un nuovo corpus, MCScript. Contiene un elevato numero di domande che richiedono conoscenze di buon senso per trovare la risposta corretta. 11 squadre provenienti da 4 paesi diversi hanno partecipato a questo compito condiviso, la maggior parte di loro ha utilizzato approcci neurali. Il sistema più performante raggiunge un'accuratezza dell'83,95%, superando le linee di base di un ampio margine, ma ancora lontano dal limite superiore umano, che è stato riscontrato al 98%.", 'lt': 'Šioje ataskaitoje apibendrinami 2018 m. SemEval uždavinio dėl mašinų supratimo rezultatai naudojant bendrąsias žinias. Šiam mašinos supratimo uždaviniui sukūrėme naują korpusą, MCScript. Jame pateikiama daug klausimų, kuriems reikia bendrų žinių, kad būtų galima rasti teisingą atsakymą. Šioje bendroje užduotyje dalyvavo 11 komandų iš 4 skirtingų šalių, dauguma jų taikė nervinius metodus. Geriausiai veikianti sistema užtikrina 83,95 proc. tikslumą, palyginti su bazinėmis linijomis didele marža, tačiau vis dar toli nuo žmogaus viršutinės ribos, kuri buvo 98 proc.', 'mt': 'Dan ir-rapport jagħti sommarju tar-riżultati tal-kompitu SemEval 2018 dwar il-komprensjoni tal-magni bl-użu ta’ għarfien komuni. Għal dan il-kompitu ta’ komprensjoni tal-magna, a ħna ħolqu korpus ġdid, MCScript. Fih għadd għoli ta’ mistoqsijiet li jeħtieġu għarfien komuni biex tinstab it-tweġiba korretta. 11-il tim minn 4 pajjiżi differenti pparteċipaw f’dan il-kompitu kondiviż, il-biċċa l-kbira minnhom użaw approċċi newrali. Is-sistema bl-a ħjar prestazzjoni tikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 83.95%, li taqbeż il-linji bażi b’marġini kbir, iżda għadha ’l bogħod mil-limitu ta’ fuq tal-bniedem, li nstab li kien ta’ 98%.', 'ml': '@ info: status ഈ യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ജോലിക്ക്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരുന്നു. ശരിയായ ഉത്തരം കണ്ടെത്തുവാന്\u200d കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് അറിവ് ആവശ്യമുള്ള ഒരുപാട് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d അതില്\u200d ഉണ്ട്. നാലു വ്യത്യസ്ത രാജ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള 11 ടീമുകള്\u200d ഈ പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. അവരില്\u200d മി ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം 83. 95 ശതമാനം എത്തുന്നതാണ്, ഒരു വലിയ മാര്\u200dഗിന്\u200d കൊണ്ട് അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്,', 'ms': 'This report summarizes the results of the SemEval 2018 task on machine comprehension using commonsense knowledge.  Untuk tugas pemahaman mesin ini, kami mencipta korpus baru, MCScript. Ia mengandungi banyak soalan yang memerlukan pengetahuan umum untuk mencari jawapan yang betul. 11 pasukan dari 4 negara yang berbeza berpartisipasi dalam tugas berkongsi ini, kebanyakan mereka menggunakan pendekatan saraf. Sistem prestasi terbaik mencapai ketepatan 83.95%, melebihi garis dasar dengan margin besar, tetapi masih jauh dari batas atas manusia, yang ditemukan berada pada 98%.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy raport podsumowuje wyniki zadania SemEval 2018 dotyczące rozumienia maszyn z wykorzystaniem wiedzy zdrowego rozsądku. Dla tego zadania rozumienia maszyny stworzyliśmy nowy korpus, MCScript. Zawiera dużą liczbę pytań, które wymagają zdrowej wiedzy, aby znaleźć właściwą odpowiedź. W tym wspólnym zadaniu uczestniczyło 11 zespoły z czterech różnych krajów, większość z nich korzystała z podejść neuronowych. Najlepiej wydajny system osiąga dokładność 83,95%, przewyższającą linię bazową o duży margines, ale nadal daleko od ludzkiej górnej granicy, która stwierdzono, że znajduje się w 98%.', 'mn': 'Энэ тайлбар 2018 оны SemEval-ын ажлын үр дүнг машины ойлголтын тухай ойлголтын тухай илтгэдэг. Энэ машин ойлголтын ажлын тулд бид шинэ корпус, MCScript-г бүтээсэн. Энэ нь зөв хариултыг олох боломжтой ихэнх асуулт хэрэгтэй. 4 өөр улс орнуудын 11 баг энэ хуваалцах ажил дээр оролцсон. Ихэнх нь мэдрэлийн ойлголт ашигладаг. Хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааны систем 83.95%-ын тодорхойлолтой болж, үндсэн шугамнуудыг маш том хэмжээгээр илүүтэй болгодог. Гэхдээ хүн төрөлхтний дээд хэмжээгээс ч хол байна. Энэ нь 98%.', 'si': 'මේ වාර්තාව සාමාන්\u200dය දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සම්වෙව්ල් 2018 වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජන මේ මැෂින් එක්ක තේරුම් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි අලුත් කෝපස් එකක් නිර්මාණය කළා, MCScript. ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය දැනගන්න අවශ්\u200dයයි, හරි උත්තර හොයාගන්න. වෙනස් දේශ 4යෙන් කණ්ඩායම් 11 කණ්ඩායම් එක්ක මේ වෙනුවෙන් කාර්යයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වුනා, ඔවුන්ගේ ග හොඳම ප්\u200dරවේශනය පද්ධතිය 83.95% ගැන සිද්ධතාවක් ලැබෙනවා, විශාල ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, නමුත් තවමත් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ උඩ ප්\u200dර', 'no': 'Denne rapporten samanserer resultatet av semiEval 2018-oppgåva på maskineforståelse med vanleg kunnskap. For denne maskinen undersøkingsoppgåva, oppretta vi ein ny korpus, MCScript. Det inneheld mange spørsmål som krev vanleg kunnskap for å finna den rette svaret. 11 grupper frå 4 forskjellige land delta i denne delte oppgåva. Dei fleste brukte neuraltilnærmingar. Den beste utføringssystemet oppnår ein nøyaktig av 83,95 %, som utfører baselinjene med ein stor margin, men fortsatt langt frå den øvre bånden menneske, som ble funne til å vera 98 %.', 'ro': 'Acest raport rezumă rezultatele sarcinii SemEval 2018 privind înțelegerea mașinilor folosind cunoștințe de bun simț. Pentru această sarcină de înțelegere a mașinii, am creat un corpus nou, MCScript. Conține un număr mare de întrebări care necesită cunoștințe bune pentru a găsi răspunsul corect. 11 echipe din 4 țări diferite au participat la această sarcină comună, majoritatea utilizând abordări neuronale. Cel mai performant sistem atinge o precizie de 83,95%, depășind liniile de bază cu o marjă mare, dar încă departe de limita superioară umană, care s-a constatat a fi la 98%.', 'sr': 'Ovaj izveštaj sažetuje rezultate zadatka SemEval 2018 o razumijevanju mašine koristeći zajedničke znanje. Za ovaj zadatak razumevanja mašine, stvorili smo novi korpus, MCScript. U njemu se nalazi veliki broj pitanja koji zahtevaju znanje zajedničkog smisla za pronalaženje pravog odgovora. 11 timova iz 4 različitih zemalja sudjelovalo je u ovom zajedničkom zadatku, većina njih je koristila neuralne pristupe. Najbolji izvršni sistem postiže tačnost od 83,95%, koji je nadmašio osnovne linije velikom marginom, ali još uvek daleko od ljudskog gornjeg povezanog, što je smatralo 98%.', 'ta': 'This report summarizes the results of the SemEval 2018 task on machine compression using commercial knowledge. இந்த இயந்திரத்தின் சுருக்கம் பணிக்கு, நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய குறுநிரலை உருவாக்கினோம். இதில் சரியான விடையை கண்டுபிடிக்க தொழில்நுட்பமான அறிவு தேவைப்படும் அதிக எண்ணிக்கையில் உள்ளது. நான்கு வேறு நாடுகளில் இருந்து 11 குழுக்கள் இந்த பகிர்ந்த பணியில் பங்கிட்டனர், பெரும்பாலோர் புதிய நெ சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் அமைப்பு 83. 95% சரியான பெறுகிறது, பெரிய ஓரம் மூலம் அடிப்படைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது, ஆனால் இன்னும் மேல் பிணைப்பில் இருந', 'ur': 'اس راپورت نے عمومی علم کے استعمال کے مطابق ماشین کی سمجھنے کے لئے SemEval 2018 کے نتیجے کا ذکر کیا ہے. اس ماشین کے لئے ہم نے ایک نئی کورپوس پیدا کیا، MCScript. اس میں بہت سی سوال ہیں جن کی تعداد ٹھیک جواب تلاش کے لئے عادت علم کی ضرورت ہے. چار مختلف ملک میں سے 11 تیم اس مشترک کام میں شریک ہوئے، ان میں سے اکثر نیورال طریقے استعمال کرتے تھے. بہترین عمل سیستم 83.95% کی دقیق پہنچتی ہے، اس سے زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ بنیادی خط سے، لیکن انسان کے اوپر سے دور ہے، جسے 98% سے پایا گیا تھا۔', 'so': "Boggan wargelinta wuxuu ku summarinayaa dhamaadka shaqada SemEval 2018 ee lagu isticmaalayo aqoonta shirkadda. Shaqadan hoos u dhigista machine, waxaynu abuurnay qof cusub, MCScript. Waxaa ku jira su'aalo badan oo u baahan aqoonta shirkadda si aad u hesho jawaabta saxda ah. 11 koox oo ka yimid 4 wadamada kala duduwan waxay ka qeybqaadan jireen shuqulkaas la qaybsan, intooda badan waxay isticmaaleen qaabab neuro ah. nidaamka ugu fiican ee sameynta wuxuu gaadhaa saxda 83.95 boqolkiiba, wuxuuna sameynayaa dareemada hoose oo aad u weyn, laakiin weli way ka fog yihiin xidhiidhka sare ee dadka, taasoo laga helay inay tahay 98 boqolkiiba.", 'sv': 'Denna rapport sammanfattar resultaten av SemEval 2018-uppgiften om maskinförståelse med allmännyttig kunskap. För den här maskinförståelseuppgiften skapade vi en ny korpus, MCScript. Den innehåller ett stort antal frågor som kräver allmännyttig kunskap för att hitta rätt svar. 11 team från 4 olika länder deltog i denna gemensamma uppgift, de flesta använde neurala metoder. Det bästa systemet uppnår en noggrannhet på 83,95%, överträffar baslinjerna med stor marginal, men fortfarande långt från den mänskliga övre gränsen, som befanns ligga på 98%.', 'uz': "@ info Ushbu mashinani murojaat qilish uchun, biz yangi kompyuter, MCScript yaratdik. Bu yerda toʻgʻri javob topish uchun xabar imkoniyat kerak boʻlgan ko'p savollar mavjud. 4 boshqa davlatdan 11 guruhi ushbu ishga ega bo'lgan edi. Ko'pchilik neyron usullarini foydalanadi. Bu eng yaxshi bajarish tizimi 83.95 foizga ega bo'ladi, bir katta harfga asboblarning asboblarini bajaradi, lekin eng yuqori bog'liqdan uzoqdir, bu 98 foizda topilgan.", 'vi': 'Bản báo cáo này tổng hợp kết quả của nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác bộ máy bằng kiến thức thông thường. Chúng tôi tạo ra một tập đoàn mới, MCScript. Nó chứa rất nhiều câu hỏi yêu cầu kiến thức thông thường để tìm ra câu trả lời đúng. Mười đội từ bốn quốc gia khác nhau tham gia vào nhiệm vụ chung này, hầu hết họ sử dụng các phương pháp thần kinh. Hệ thống ứng dụng tốt nhất đạt được độ chính xác của Tiến Sĩ 897 vượt qua con đường nền với một khoảng cách lớn nhưng vẫn còn xa con người', 'hr': 'Ovaj izvještaj sažetuje rezultate zadatka SemEval 2018-a o razumijevanju strojeva s primjenom znanja zajedničkog smisla. Za ovaj zadatak razumijevanja strojeva, stvorili smo novi korpus, MCScript. U njemu se nalazi visok broj pitanja koji zahtijevaju znanje zajedničkog smisla za pronalaženje pravog odgovora. 11 timova iz 4 različitih zemalja sudjelovalo je u ovom zajedničkom zadatku, većina njih koristila neurološke pristupe. Najbolji izvršni sustav postiže preciznost od 83,95%, što je iznosi početne linije velikom marginom, ali još uvijek daleko od ljudskog gornjeg povezanog, što je smatralo 98%.', 'nl': 'Dit rapport vat de resultaten samen van de SemEval 2018-taak over machinebegrip met behulp van gezond verstand. Voor deze machine understanding taak hebben we een nieuw corpus gemaakt, MCScript. Het bevat een groot aantal vragen die gezond verstand vereisen om het juiste antwoord te vinden. 11 teams uit vier verschillende landen namen deel aan deze gezamenlijke taak, de meesten gebruikten neurale benaderingen. Het best presterende systeem bereikt een nauwkeurigheid van 83,95%, die de basislijnen met een grote marge overtreft, maar nog steeds ver van de menselijke bovengrens, die bleek te liggen op 98%.', 'de': 'Dieser Bericht fasst die Ergebnisse der SemEval 2018-Aufgabe zum maschinellen Verstehen mit gesundem Menschenverstand zusammen. Für diese Aufgabe des maschinellen Verständnisses haben wir ein neues Korpus erstellt, MCScript. Es enthält eine hohe Anzahl von Fragen, die gesundes Wissen erfordern, um die richtige Antwort zu finden. An dieser gemeinsamen Aufgabe beteiligten sich elf Teams aus vier verschiedenen Ländern, die meisten verwendeten neuronale Ansätze. Das leistungsstärkste System erreicht eine Genauigkeit von 83,95%, die die Basislinien deutlich übertrifft, aber immer noch weit von der menschlichen Obergrenze entfernt ist, die bei 98%.', 'id': 'Laporan ini mempersingkatkan hasil dari tugas SemEval 2018 tentang pemahaman mesin menggunakan pengetahuan umum. For this machine comprehension task, we created a new corpus, MCScript.  Ini mengandung banyak pertanyaan yang membutuhkan pengetahuan umum untuk menemukan jawaban yang benar. 11 tim dari 4 negara yang berbeda berpartisipasi dalam tugas bersama ini, kebanyakan dari mereka menggunakan pendekatan saraf. Sistem prestasi terbaik mencapai akurasi 83,95%, melebihi garis dasar dengan margin besar, tetapi masih jauh dari batas atas manusia, yang ditemukan pada 98%.', 'bg': 'Този доклад обобщава резултатите от задачата за машинно разбиране, използвайки общо разумно познание. За тази задача за машинно разбиране създадохме нов корпус, MCScript. Той съдържа голям брой въпроси, които изискват разумни знания за намиране на правилния отговор. В тази споделена задача участваха 11 екипа от 4 различни страни, повечето от които използваха невронни подходи. Най-добре представящата система постига точност от 83.95%, надминава базовите линии с голям марж, но все още далеч от горната граница на човека, която е установена на 98%.', 'ko': '이 보고서는 SemEval 2018의 기계를 상식적으로 이해하는 임무에 대한 결과를 요약하였다.이 기계의 이해 작업에 대해 우리는 새로운 자료 라이브러리 MCScript를 만들었다.그것은 상식 지식이 있어야만 정확한 답안을 찾을 수 있는 많은 문제를 포함하고 있다.4개국에서 온 11개 팀이 이 공유 임무에 참여했는데 대부분이 신경 방법을 사용했다.성능이 가장 좋은 시스템은 83.95%의 정확도에 이르러 기선을 크게 넘었지만 인류의 상한선인 98% 보다 훨씬 낮다.', 'da': 'Denne rapport opsummerer resultaterne af SemEval 2018-opgaven om maskinforståelse ved hjælp af almindelig viden. Til denne maskinforståelsesopgave oprettede vi et nyt korpus, MCScript. Den indeholder et stort antal spørgsmål, der kræver almindelig viden for at finde det rigtige svar. 11 hold fra 4 forskellige lande deltog i denne fælles opgave, de fleste af dem brugte neurale tilgange. Det bedst ydende system opnår en nøjagtighed på 83,95%, hvilket overgår basislinjerne med en stor margin, men stadig langt fra den menneskelige øvre grænse, som blev fundet at være på 98%.', 'tr': 'Bu rapor SemEval 2018 zadynyň netijelerini maşynyň çykyşynda düşünýän bilgilerini ulanýar. Bu maşynyň düşünmesi üçin biz täze bir korpus bejerdik. Doğru cevap tapmak için matematik bilgi gereken birçok soru içerir. 4 dürli ýurtdan 11 topar bu paýlaşan zada gatnaşdy. Olaryň köpüsi näral ýagdaýlaryny ulandylar. Iň gowy etmäge sistem 83.95%-den dogry ýagdaýyny çykar, baz çukurlaryny uly daşyrdan çykar, ýöne adamyň üstünden daşyrdan uzak bolup 98%.', 'af': "Hierdie raporteer versamel die resultate van die SemEval 2018 taak op masjien verstaan met gebruik van gemeenskaplike kennis. Vir hierdie masjien verstaan opdrag het ons 'n nuwe corpus, MCScript skep. Dit bevat 'n hoë aantal vrae wat gewone kennis nodig om die korrekte antwoord te vind. 11 teams van 4 verskillende lande het deel in hierdie gedeelde taak, meeste van hulle het neurale toegang gebruik. Die beste uitvoerde stelsel bereik 'n presisie van 83,95%, wat die basisline uitvoer deur 'n groot marge, maar nog ver van die menslike boonste gebind, wat gevind is om by 98%.", 'am': 'ይህ ሪፖርት የSemEval 2018 ስራ ውጤቶችን በመስኮት እውቀትን በመጠቀም የመሳሪያውን ጉዳይ ያሳያል፡፡ ለዚህ መሳሪያው ስራ አዲስ ኮርፕስ (MCS) አፈጣጠርን፡፡ እውነተኛውን መልስ ለማግኘት የስህተት እውቀት የሚያስፈልጋቸው ብዙ ጥያቄዎች አሉ፡፡ ከ4 ልዩ አገር ያሉት 11 ቡድን በዚህ ተካፋፊ ስራ ተጋጠሙ፤ አብዛኞቻቸው የነዌብ ልውስና ተጠቃሚዎች ናቸው፡፡ የተሻለ የሥርዓት ስርዓት 83.95 በመቶ ያህል ነው፡፡', 'fa': 'این گزارش نتایج کاری SemEval ۲۰۰۸ را با استفاده از دانش معمولی در دستگاه تعریف می\u200cکند. برای این ماشین کار درک کردن، ما یک کورپوس جدید، MCScript ایجاد کردیم. شامل تعدادی از سوالات زیادی است که برای پیدا کردن جواب درست نیاز به دانش معمولی دارند. ۱۱ تیم از چهار کشور مختلف در این کار مشترک شرکت کردند، بیشتر از آنها از دسترسی عصبی استفاده کردند. بهترین سیستم عملکرد دقیق 83.95 درصد را می رساند، که پایین\u200cها را با یک مرز بزرگ انجام می\u200cدهد، ولی هنوز دور از پایین\u200cهای انسان است، که به 98 درصد متوجه شده است.', 'hy': 'Այս զեկույցը համառոտագրում է 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" գործառույթի արդյունքները մեքենայի հասկացության մասին, օգտագործելով ընդհանուր գիտելիքներ: Այս մեքենայի ընկալումների համար մենք ստեղծեցինք նոր կորպուս, MCS-ն: Այն պարունակում է մի շարք հարցեր, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են ընդհանուր գիտելիք ճիշտ պատասխանի գտնելու համար: 4 տարբեր երկրներից 11 թիմ մասնակցել էին այս ընդհանուր խնդրին, նրանցից շատերը օգտագործում էին նյարդային մոտեցումներ: Ամենալավ արդյունավետ համակարգը հասնում է ճշգրիտության 8395 տոկոսին, որը բազմաթիվ արժեքներով գերազանցում է հիմնական գծերը, բայց դեռևս հեռու է մարդկային վերին սահմաններից, որը 98 տոկոսին էր:', 'sw': 'Ripoti hii inasimulia matokeo ya kazi ya SemEval 2018 kuhusu kompyuta ya mashine kwa kutumia maarifa ya umma. Kwa kazi hii ya kompyuta ya mashine, tulitengeneza makampuni mpya, MCScript. Ina maswali mengi yanayohitaji maarifa ya umma kwa kutafuta jibu sahihi. Timu 11 kutoka nchi nne tofauti walishiriki katika kazi hii, wengi wao walitumia mbinu za uraia. Mfumo bora wa utendaji unapata uhakika wa asilimia 83.95, ukifanya misingi ya msingi kwa kiwango kikubwa, lakini bado ni mbali na mfumo wa juu wa binadamu, ambao ulionekana ni asilimia 98.', 'az': 'Bu xəbər 2018-ci SemEval öyrəndiyi məktəbinə istifadə edir. Bu maşın anlama işi üçün yeni corpus, MCScript yaratdıq. Doğru cavabı tapmaq üçün çox çox sual var. 4 müxtəlif ülkedən 11 takım bu paylaşılmış işdə yer aldı, onların əksəriyyəti nöral tərzlərini kullandı. Ən yaxşı təhsil sistemi 83,95%-in doğruluğuna nail ola bilər, baz çətinlərini böyük bir tərəfdən üstün edərlər, amma hələ də insanların yüksək tərəfdən uzaqlaşdırılmışdır, ki bu 98%-in tərəfdə olduğunu görürdü.', 'bs': 'Ovaj izvještaj sažetuje rezultate zadatka SemEval 2018 o razumijevanju strojeva s upotrebom znanja zajedničkog smisla. Za ovaj zadatak razumijevanja mašine, stvorili smo novi korpus, MCScript. Ona sadrži visoko broj pitanja koje zahtijevaju znanje zajedničkog smisla za pronalaženje pravog odgovora. 11 timova iz 4 različitih zemalja učestvovali su u ovom zajedničkom zadatku, većina njih je koristila neuralne pristupe. Najbolji izvršni sistem postiže tačnost od 83,95%, koji je nadmašio osnovne linije velikom marginom, ali još uvijek daleko od ljudskog gornjeg povezanog, što je smatralo 98%.', 'ca': 'Aquest informe resume els resultats de la tasca SemEval 2018 sobre la comprensió màquina utilitzant coneixements comuns. Per aquesta tasca de comprensió de la màquina, vam crear un nou corpus, MCScript. Conté un gran nombre de preguntes que requereixen coneixement comú per trobar la resposta correct a. 11 equips de 4 països van participar en aquesta tasca compartida, la majoria van utilitzar enfocaments neuronals. El sistema de millor rendiment aconsegueix una precisió del 83,95%, superant les línies de base en un gran marge, però encara lluny de la superfície human a, que va ser al 98%.', 'sq': 'Ky raport përmbledh rezultatet e detyrës SemEval 2018 mbi kuptimin e makinave duke përdorur njohuri të përbashkët. For this machine comprehension task, we created a new corpus, MCScript.  Ajo përmban një numër të lartë pyetjesh që kërkojnë njohuri të përbashkët për të gjetur përgjigjen e duhur. 11 ekipe nga 4 vende të ndryshme morën pjesë në këtë detyrë të përbashkët, shumica e tyre përdorën metoda nervore. Sistemi me performancë më të mirë arrin një saktësi prej 83.95%, që tejkalon linjat bazë me një margin të madh, por ende larg kufirit të lartë të njeriut, i cili u gjet në 98%.', 'cs': 'Tato zpráva shrnuje výsledky úlohy SemEval 2018 o porozumění strojům s využitím znalostí zdravého rozumu. Pro tento úkol strojového porozumění jsme vytvořili nový korpus, MCScript. Obsahuje velké množství otázek, které vyžadují zdravé znalosti pro nalezení správné odpovědi. Na tomto společném úkolu se podílelo jedenáct týmů ze čtyř různých zemí, většina z nich používala neuronové přístupy. Nejlépe výkonný systém dosahuje přesnosti 83,95%, překonává základní čáry o velký rozpětí, ale stále daleko od lidské horní hranice, která byla zjištěna jako 98%.', 'fi': 'T채ss채 raportissa esitet채채n yhteenveto SemEval 2018 -teht채v채n tuloksista koneymm채rryksest채 j채rkev채n tiedon avulla. T채t채 koneymm채rryst채 varten luotiin uusi corpus, MCScript. Se sis채lt채채 suuren m채채r채n kysymyksi채, jotka vaativat j채rkev채채 tietoa oikean vastauksen l철yt채miseksi. T채h채n yhteiseen teht채v채채n osallistui 11 tiimi채 nelj채st채 eri maasta, joista suurin osa k채ytti hermomenetelmi채. Parhaiten suoriutuvan j채rjestelm채n tarkkuus on 83,95%, mik채 ylitt채채 perusviivat suurella marginaalilla, mutta silti kaukana ihmisen yl채rajasta, jonka todettiin olevan 98%.', 'bn': 'এই রিপোর্ট কমিউনেন্সেন্সের জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজের ফলাফল সংক্ষিপ্ত করেছে। এই মেশিন সম্পূর্ণ কাজের জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন কোর্পাস তৈরি করেছি, এমসিসিক্রিপ্ট। এর মধ্যে অনেক প্রশ্ন রয়েছে যা সঠিক উত্তর খুঁজে বের করার জন্য কমানসেন্সের জ্ঞান দরকার। ৪টি ভিন্ন দেশ থেকে ১১টি দল এই শেয়ার কর্মসূচিতে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে, তাদের অধিকাংশই নিউরেল প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যবহার কর The best performing system achieves an accuracy of 83.95%, outperforming the baselines by a large margin, but still far from the human upper bound, which was found to be at 98%.', 'et': 'Käesolevas aruandes võetakse kokku SemEval 2018 ülesande tulemused masinate mõistmise kohta, kasutades üldteadmisi. Selle masinateadmise ülesande jaoks loosime uue korpuse, MCScript. See sisaldab suurt hulka küsimusi, mis nõuavad mõistlikke teadmisi õige vastuse leidmiseks. Selles ühises ülesandes osales 11 meeskonda neljast erinevast riigist, enamik neist kasutas neuraalseid lähenemisviise. Parima tulemusega süsteem saavutab 83,95% täpsuse, ületades lähtejooni suure marginaali, kuid siiski kaugel inimese ülemisest piirist, mis leiti olevat 98%.', 'jv': 'Ndeleng iki dadi resumes menyang diputaaken pating semebal 2020 nang pating pangan komputer nggawe barang nggawe barang nggambar barang bongkar sapa-bongkar. Ngawe Perintah sing kompleh akeh gunggo iki, dhewe nyingkilake banget karo bodho sing dibutuhke Punika sing nduwe akeh akeh pisan sing diputungan kanggo nyatakake dipunangé ngerti apa ora ono. 11 Sampeyan ing 4 sampeyan pating pengguna nang pating iki, akeh tangan karo hal-hal sing ngulinakake tarjamahan. Awak dhéwé sing nggawe sistem sing bisa nêmêr, dadi tanggal wih-wih sabané, njuk mékalé awak dhéwé, njuk mékalé awak dhéwé, njuk mékalé awak dhéwé sing katêpakan karo akeh sing nêmêr, ndéwé wis asèh, kaya mékalé awa', 'ha': "This report summarizes the results of the SemEval 2018 task on machine comprehension using commonsense knowledge.  Ga wannan aikin maɓallin ƙaranci, mun halitta wata sabo na daban, MCAScript. Yana da wasu masu yawa na tambayi waɗanda ke tambayar ma'anar gaskiyar da za'a buƙata wajen sami'in da za'a sami jawabar gaske. Wani jama'a 11 daga 4 Countries dabam sun yi rabo da wannan aikin da aka raba shi, mafi yawansu sun yi amfani da hanyoyin neurali. Babbar mafarin aikin aiki na sami tsari na 83.95%, yana samar da bakin margin babba, kuma amma yana da mafi nĩsa daga mazaɓan mutum, wanda aka gane shi yana da 98%.", 'sk': 'To poročilo povzema rezultate naloge SemEval 2018 o strojnem razumevanju z uporabo splošnega smisla znanja. Za to nalogo strojnega razumevanja smo ustvarili nov korpus, MCScript. Vsebuje veliko število vprašanj, ki zahtevajo splošno znanje za iskanje pravilnega odgovora. Pri tej skupni nalogi je sodelovalo 11 ekip iz 4 različnih držav, večina jih je uporabljala nevronske pristope. Najboljši sistem dosega natančnost 83,95%, kar za veliko mejo presega osnovne črte, vendar še vedno daleč od zgornje meje človeka, ki je bila ugotovljena na 98%.', 'bo': 'ཡར་ཞུ་འདིས་རྗེས་འདིས་ རྒྱལ་ཁབ་༢༠༠་ཅན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཇི་ལྟར་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདིའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ཡོད། དེ་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་ཤེས་རིག་མང་པོ་ཡོད། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་འདི་བཞིན་པའི་མི་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་ལས་དབང་ཆ་གཅིག་ནི་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཁོང་ཚོའི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་ནི་83.95% ཡིན་པས་ཆེ་མཐོང་ན་ཡིན་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་མི་མཐོང་ཚད་ལྡན་ཞིག་མཐར་ཡོད་པ་རེད།', 'he': 'This report summarizes the results of the SemEval 2018 task on machine comprehension using commonsense knowledge.  עבור משימה הבנה המכונה הזאת, יצרנו קורפוס חדש, MCScript. זה מכיל מספר גבוה של שאלות שדורשות ידע משותף למצוא את התשובה הנכונה. 11 קבוצות מ-4 מדינות שונות השתתפו במשימה המשותפת הזו, רובם השתמשו באמצעות גישות עצביות. מערכת ההופעה הטובה ביותר משיגה מדויקה של 83.95%, מעלית את קווי הבסיס על ידי שווה גדולה, אך עדיין רחוקה מהגבול העליון האנושי, שנמצא שהיה ב-98%.'}
{'en': 'Yuanfudao at SemEval-2018 Task 11 : Three-way Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'ar': 'Yuanfudao في SemEval-2018 المهمة 11: الانتباه ثلاثي الاتجاهات والمعرفة العلائقية لفهم آلة العموم', 'es': 'Yuanfudao en la Tarea 11 de SemEval-2018: Atención tripartita y conocimiento relacional para la comprensión de máquinas de sentido común', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018でのYuanfudaoタスク11 ：共通感覚機械理解のための三方向の注意と関係知識', 'pt': 'Yuanfudao na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 11: Atenção de três vias e conhecimento relacional para compreensão de máquina de senso comum', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 11 पर युआनफूडाओ: कॉमनसेंस मशीन समझ के लिए तीन-तरफ़ा ध्यान और संबंधपरक ज्ञान', 'fr': 'Yuanfudao à SemEval-2018 Tâche 11\xa0: Attention à trois et connaissances relationnelles pour la compréhension automatique du bon sens', 'ru': 'Юаньфудао на SemEval-2018 Задача 11: Трехстороннее внимание и знание отношений для понимания машины общего смысла', 'ga': 'Yuanfudao ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Aird Trí Bhealach agus Eolas Coibhneasta do Thuiscint Meaisíní Commonsense', 'zh': '袁福道在SemEval-2018务11:常识机器三向所关', 'el': 'Εργασία 11: Τριπλή προσοχή και σχεσιακή γνώση για την κατανόηση μηχανών κοινής λογικής', 'ka': 'Yuanfudao semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 11: სამი გზა და შესაბამისი მეცნიერება Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'hu': 'Yuanfudao a SemEval-2018 11. feladat: Három irányú figyelem és kapcsolati tudás a közérzeti gépek megértéséhez', 'it': 'Yuanfudao a SemEval-2018 Task 11: attenzione a tre vie e conoscenza relazionale per la comprensione delle macchine del commonsense', 'kk': 'Yuanfudao at semiEval-2018 Task 11: Three-way Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'lt': '„Yuanfudao“ programos „SemEval-2018“ 11 užduotis: trikryptinis dėmesys ir santykinės žinios bendrųjų mašinų supratimui', 'mk': 'Јуанфудао на SemEval-2018 задача 11: Тривокупно внимание и релативно знаење за разбирање на заедничките машини', 'mt': 'Yuanfudao f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 11: Attenzjoni Tridirezzjonali u Għarfien Relazzjonali għall-Komprensjoni Komuni tal-Makkinarju', 'ms': 'Yuanfudao di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Perhatian Tiga Arah dan Pengetahuan Perhubungan untuk Pemahaman Mesin Komuni', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 11: കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് മെഷീന്\u200d പുതുക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള മൂന്ന് വഴി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Yuanfudao at SemEval-2018 Task 11: 3-way Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'no': 'Yuanfudao at semiEval-2018 Task 11: Trivei Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'pl': 'Yuanfudao w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 11: Trójkierunkowa uwaga i wiedza relacyjna dla zrozumienia maszyn powszechnych', 'ro': 'Yuanfudao la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 11: Atenție în trei căi și cunoștințe relaționale pentru înțelegerea mașinilor de bun simț', 'sr': 'Yuanfudao na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: trosmjerna pažnja i vezna znanja za komprehenziju mašine Commonsense', 'si': 'YuanFuda at semeval-2018 Job 11: Three-way Attension and Associal KnowKnowKnowness for Comsenses machine Comprevension', 'so': 'Yuanfudao ee SemEval-2018 Shaqada 11: Saddex-way Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commons Machine Comprehension', 'sv': 'Yuanfudao på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 11: Trevägs uppmärksamhet och relationskunskap för Commonsense Machine Förståelse', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 11: தொடர்பு இயந்திரத்திற்கான மூன்று வழி கவனம் மற்றும் தொடர்பு அறிவிப்பு', 'ur': 'Yuanfudao at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Three-way Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Vũ trường tại Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task 11: Chú ý và kiến tương đối về tổng hợp cơ khí phổ thông.', 'bg': 'Юанфудао в Задача 11: Трипосочно внимание и относително знание за разбиране на обикновените машини', 'nl': 'Yuanfudao bij SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Drie-weg aandacht en relationele kennis voor het begrijpen van Commonsense Machine', 'da': 'Yuanfudao på SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Trevejs opmærksomhed og forholdsmæssig viden til almindelig maskinforståelse', 'id': 'Yuanfudao di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Perhatian Tiga Arah dan Pengetahuan Relatif untuk Pemahaman Mesin Komunis', 'de': 'Yuanfudao bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 11: Drei-Wege-Aufmerksamkeit und Beziehungswissen für das Verständnis von Rohstoffmaschinen', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 미션11: 상식기계 이해의 삼방향 주의와 관계지식', 'sw': 'Yuanfudao katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 11: Uchunguzi wa njia tatu na ufahamu wa Kuhusiana kwa Mashindano ya Kompani', 'fa': 'Yuanfudao at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Three-way Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'tr': 'Yuanfudao at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Three-way Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'af': 'Yuanfudao by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 11: Drie-weg Aangaande en Relatiewe kennis vir Commonsense Masjien Komplerensie', 'am': 'ዩያንፉዲዮ በSemEval-2018 ስራ 11:', 'hy': 'Յուանֆուդաոն, 2018-ի ՍեմԵվալ 11-րդ հանձնարարության համար ընդհանուր մեքենայի հասկացության երեք ուղղությամբ ուշադրություն և հարաբերական գիտելիք', 'sq': 'Yuanfudao në SemEval-2018 Task 11: Kujdes tre-drejtore dhe njohuri lidhur për kompresimin e makinave të përbashkëta', 'hr': 'Yuanfudao na zadatku 11. polovječna-2018: trosmjerna pozornost i vezna znanja za komprehenziju mašine Commonsense-a', 'az': 'Yuanfudao at SemEval-2018 Task 11: 3-way Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১১: কমোনসেন্স মেশিনের জন্য তিনভাবে মনোযোগ ও সম্পর্কিত জ্ঞান', 'bs': 'Yuanfudao na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: trosmjerna pažnja i vezna znanja za komprehenziju mašine Commonsense', 'cs': 'Yuanfudao na SemEval-2018 Úkol 11: Trojsměrná pozornost a vztahové znalosti pro porozumění zdravotních strojů', 'ca': 'Yuanfudao a SemEval-2018 tasca 11: Atenció en tres direccions i coneixement relatiu per a la comprensió de màquines comunes', 'fi': 'Yuanfudao SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 11: Kolmisuunnainen huomio ja suhteellinen tietämys Commonsense Machine Compreension', 'et': 'Yuanfudao SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 11: Kolmesuunaline tähelepanu ja suhtelised teadmised tavalise masina mõistmiseks', 'jv': 'Yuanfdao nang semi-2008 task 11', 'ha': 'Yuanfudao at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 11: Three-way Attachment and Relative Cilm for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'sk': 'Yuanfudao na SemEval-2018 naloga 11: Trismerno pozornost in relativno znanje za razumevanje splošnih strojev', 'he': 'יואנפודאו ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 11: תשומת לב בשלושה כיוונים ומדע יחסי להבינה של מכונות קומפונסנטית', 'bo': 'Yuanfudao at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Three-way Attention and Relational Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system for SemEval-2018 Task 11 : Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. We use Three-way Attentive Networks (TriAN) to model interactions between the passage, question and answers. To incorporate commonsense knowledge, we augment the input with relation embedding from the graph of general knowledge ConceptNet. As a result, our system achieves state-of-the-art performance with 83.95 % accuracy on the official test data. Code is publicly available at.https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc.\n    ', 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro sistema para la Tarea 11 de SemEval-2018: Comprensión de máquinas mediante el conocimiento de sentido común. Utilizamos redes atentas de tres vías (TriAN) para modelar las interacciones entre el pasaje, la pregunta y las respuestas. Para incorporar el conocimiento de sentido común, aumentamos la entrada con la incorporación de relaciones del gráfico de conocimiento general ConceptNet. Como resultado, nuestro sistema logra un rendimiento de vanguardia con una precisión del 83,95% en los datos de pruebas oficiales. El código está disponible públicamente en < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema para a Tarefa 11 do SemEval-2018: Compreensão da máquina usando o conhecimento do senso comum. Usamos Three-way Attentive Networks (TriAN) para modelar as interações entre a passagem, a pergunta e as respostas. Para incorporar o conhecimento de senso comum, aumentamos a entrada com a incorporação de relação do gráfico de conhecimento geral ConceptNet. Como resultado, nosso sistema alcança desempenho de última geração com 83,95% de precisão nos dados oficiais de teste. O código está disponível publicamente em <https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc>.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا لمهمة SemEval-2018 11: فهم الآلة باستخدام معرفة Commonsense. نحن نستخدم الشبكات اليقظة ثلاثية الاتجاهات (TriAN) لنمذجة التفاعلات بين المقطع والسؤال والأجوبة. لدمج المعرفة المنطقية ، نقوم بزيادة المدخلات مع تضمين العلاقة من الرسم البياني للمعرفة العامة ConceptNet. نتيجة لذلك ، يحقق نظامنا أداءً متطورًا بدقة تبلغ 83.95٪ على بيانات الاختبار الرسمية. الرمز متاح للجمهور على <https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc>.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 कार्य 11 के लिए हमारे सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है: कॉमनसेंस ज्ञान का उपयोग करके मशीन समझ। हम मार्ग, प्रश्न और उत्तरों के बीच बातचीत को मॉडल करने के लिए तीन-तरफ़ा चौकस नेटवर्क (ट्रायन) का उपयोग करते हैं। सामान्य ज्ञान ज्ञान को शामिल करने के लिए, हम सामान्य ज्ञान ConceptNet के ग्राफ से संबंध एम्बेडिंग के साथ इनपुट को बढ़ाते हैं। नतीजतन, हमारा सिस्टम आधिकारिक परीक्षण डेटा पर 83.95% सटीकता के साथ अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। कोड सार्वजनिक रूप से <https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc> पर उपलब्ध है।', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système pour SEMEval-2018 Task 11\xa0: Machine Comprehension à l'aide de Commonsense Knowledge. Nous utilisons les réseaux attentifs à trois voies (TRIan) pour modéliser les interactions entre le passage, la question et les réponses. Pour intégrer les connaissances de bon sens, nous augmentons les données avec l'intégration de relations à partir du graphique de connaissances générales ConceptNet. En conséquence, notre système atteint des performances de pointe avec une précision de 83,95\xa0% sur les données de test officielles. Le code est accessible au public à l'adresse < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018タスク11 ：コモンセンス知識を使用した機械理解のためのシステムについて説明します。私たちは、通路、質問、回答の間の相互作用をモデル化するために、三方向注意ネットワーク（ TriAN ）を使用します。常識的な知識を取り入れるために、一般的な知識ConceptNetのグラフからの関係埋め込みで入力を拡張します。その結果、当社のシステムは、公式テストデータの83.95 ％の精度で最先端のパフォーマンスを実現します。コードはで公開されている<https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc>。', 'zh': '本文述我系统SemEval-2018务11:用常识之机器解。 吾以三向网络(TriAN)拟段落,问答之相用也。 为整合常识,以众ConceptNet图中销之。 是以统遂先进,官测试数据准确率为83.95%。 代码于<https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc>上公给。', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras atá againn le haghaidh SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Tuiscint Inneall ag baint úsáide as Commonsense Knowledge. Bainimid úsáid as Líonraí Aireach Trí Bhealach (TriAN) chun idirghníomhaíochtaí idir an sliocht, an cheist agus na freagraí a shamhaltú. Chun eolas ciallmhar a chur san áireamh, cuirimid leis an ionchur le leabú gaol ó ghraf an eolais ghinearálta ConceptNet. Mar thoradh air sin, baineann ár gcóras feidhmíocht úrscothach amach le cruinneas 83.95% ar na sonraí tástála oifigiúla. Tá an cód ar fáil go poiblí ag <https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc>.', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система для задачи 11 SemEval-2018: машинное понимание с использованием знаний общего смысла. Мы используем Трехсторонние Внимательные Сети (TriAN) для моделирования взаимодействий между отрывком, вопросом и ответами. Чтобы включить знания здравого смысла, мы увеличиваем входные данные с помощью встраивания отношения из графа общих знаний ConceptNet. В результате наша система достигает самых современных показателей с точностью 83,95% по официальным тестовым данным. Код доступен в открытом доступе по адресу<https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc>.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány ismerteti a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension használatával kapcsolatos rendszerünket. A három irányú figyelemmel kísérő hálózatokat (TriAN) használjuk a folyosó, a kérdés és a válaszok közötti interakciók modellezésére. A közértelmes tudás beépítése érdekében a bemenetet az általános tudás ConceptNet grafikonjából származó kapcsolatok beágyazásával bővítjük. Ennek eredményeképpen rendszerünk 83,95%-os pontossággal ér el a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt a hivatalos tesztadatok alapján. A kód nyilvánosan elérhető < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας για την εργασία 11: Κατανόηση μηχανών χρησιμοποιώντας τη γνώση κοινής λογικής. Χρησιμοποιούμε τρίδρομα δίκτυα προσοχής (για να μοντελοποιήσουμε αλληλεπιδράσεις μεταξύ του περάσματος, της ερώτησης και των απαντήσεων. Για να ενσωματώσουμε τη γνώση κοινής λογικής, εμπλουτίζουμε την εισαγωγή με τη σχέση ενσωμάτωσης από το γράφημα της γενικής γνώσης. Ως αποτέλεσμα, το σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει την απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας με ακρίβεια 83.95% στα επίσημα δεδομένα δοκιμής. Ο κώδικας είναι δημόσιος διαθέσιμος στο < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema per SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension utilizzando Commonsense Knowledge. Utilizziamo Reti Attentive a Tre vie (TriAN) per modellare le interazioni tra passaggio, domanda e risposte. Per incorporare conoscenze di buon senso, aumentiamo l'input con l'incorporazione delle relazioni dal grafico della conoscenza generale ConceptNet. Di conseguenza, il nostro sistema raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia con una precisione dell'83,95% sui dati ufficiali dei test. Il codice è disponibile al pubblico su < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.", 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემა SemEval-2018 დავალებისთვის 11: მაქსინური კომპრენცია Commonsense Knowledge გამოყენებული. ჩვენ სამუშაო ატენტიგური ქსელები (TriAN) გამოყენებთ გადასვლა, კითხვა და პასუხების შორის მოდელურად. ჩვენ დავიყენებთ საერთო ცნობილის შესახებ, ჩვენ დავიყენებთ საერთო ცნობილის კონცესტენეტის გრაფიდან დაკავშირებული შესახებ. შემდეგ ჩვენი სისტემა 83.95% წარმოდგენა სტაციალური ტესტის მონაცემებზე. კოდი ადამიანურად ხელსაწყებელია < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc - ეა.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma mūsų sistema „SemEval-2018“ 11 užduotis: mašinų suvokimas naudojant bendrąsias žinias. Naudojame trikrypčius bandomuosius tinklus (TriAN), kad modeliuotume sąveiką tarp perėjimo, klausimo ir atsakymų. To incorporate commonsense knowledge, we augment the input with relation embedding from the graph of general knowledge ConceptNet.  Todėl mūsų sistema užtikrina pažangiausius rezultatus, o oficialių bandymų duomenų tikslumas – 83,95 %. Kodeksas viešai skelbiamas < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің жүйеңізді жарым- 2018 тапсырманың 11- тапсырмасының жүйесіне таңдайды: Commonsense білімін қолдану машинаның компререссиясы. Жолдар, сұрақ және жауаптар арасындағы қатынас үшін үш жолдық желілер (TriAN) үшін қолданамыз. Жалпы мәліметтерді біріктіру үшін, жалпы мәліметтер концепциясының графикасынан қатынау сәйкестігін көтереміз. Біздің жүйеміз официалдық сынақтар мәліметінде 83,95% дұрыстығын жеткізеді. Код жалпы <дегенде қол жеткізеді https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 11: കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസിന്റെ അറിവ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മൂന്നു വഴിയില്\u200d ആത്മെന്റിവ് നെറ്റ്രിയാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പാസ്സേജ്, ചോദ്യം, മറുപടികള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള് കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് അറിവ് ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, പൊതുവായ അറിവ് കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റ്നെറിന്\u200dറെ ഗ്രാഫില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉള്\u200dപെട അതിന്റെ ഫലമായി, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d 83. 95% പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യക് < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Pemahaman Mesin menggunakan pengetahuan umum. Kami menggunakan Rangkaian Attentif Tiga Arah (TriAN) untuk model interaksi antara laluan, soalan dan jawapan. Untuk memasukkan pengetahuan umum, kita menambah input dengan hubungan yang memasukkan dari graf pengetahuan umum ConceptNet. Sebagai hasilnya, sistem kita mencapai prestasi terbaik dengan akurat 83.95% pada data ujian rasmi. Kod tersedia secara awam pada < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем за SemEval-2018 задача 11: Машинско разбирање користејќи заедничко знаење. Ние користиме тринасоки Антивни мрежи (TriAN) за да моделираме интеракции помеѓу преминот, прашањето и одговорите. To incorporate commonsense knowledge, we augment the input with relation embedding from the graph of general knowledge ConceptNet.  Како резултат на тоа, нашиот систем постигнува најдобра резултат со 83,95% точност на официјалните тестови податоци. Кодот е јавно достапен на < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna għas-SemEval-2018 Kompitu 11: Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju bl-użu tal-Għarfien Komuni. Aħna nużaw Netwerks Attenzivi Tridirezzjonali (TriAN) biex nimmudellaw interazzjonijiet bejn il-passaġġ, il-mistoqsijiet u t-tweġibiet. Biex ninkorporaw għarfien komuni, aħna nżidu l-input b’relazzjoni inkorporata mill-graff ta’ għarfien ġenerali ConceptNet. B’riżultat ta’ dan, is-sistema tagħna tikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata b’preċiżjoni ta’ 83.95% fuq id-dejta uffiċjali tat-test. Il-kodiċi huwa disponibbli pubblikament fuq < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vår for semiEval-2018 oppgåve 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. Vi bruker tre-vei attentive nettverk (TriAN) for å modellere interaksjonar mellom passaget, spørsmål og svar. For å inkludere fellesske kunnskap, øker vi inndata med relasjon innebygd frå grafen av generelle kunnskap ConceptNet. I resultatet oppnår systemet vårt tilstand i kunsten med 83,95% nøyaktighet på dei offisielle test data. Kode er offentleg tilgjengeleg på < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2018 Task 11-ийн системийг тодорхойлж байна: Commonsense Knowledge-г ашиглан машины комплекс. Бид гурван аргаар анхаарлын сүлжээг (TriAN) ашиглаж, асуулт болон хариултуудын хоорондын харилцаа загварчлахын тулд ашиглаж байна. Олон ойлголт мэдлэгийг нэгтгэхэд бид ерөнхий мэдлэгийн ConceptNet графикийн харилцааныг нэмэгдүүлнэ. Үүний үр дүнд бидний систем ерөнхийлөгчийн туршилтын мэдээллээр 83.95% шударга байдалтай байдаг. Код олон нийтэд < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system dla SemEval-2018 Task 11: Zrozumienie maszyn z wykorzystaniem wiedzy powszechnej. Do modelowania interakcji między przejściem, pytaniem i odpowiedziami używamy trójkątowych sieci uważnych (TriAN). Aby włączyć wiedzę zdrowego rozsądku, wzbogacamy wejście o relacje osadzone z wykresu wiedzy ogólnej ConceptNet. W rezultacie nasz system osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność z dokładnością 83,95% na oficjalnych danych testowych. Kod jest publicznie dostępny pod adresem < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru pentru SemEval-2018 Sarcina 11: Înțelegerea mașinilor folosind cunoștințele Commonsense. Folosim Rețele Atenționale Trei Căi (TriAN) pentru a modela interacțiunile dintre pasaj, întrebare și răspunsuri. Pentru a încorpora cunoștințele de bun simț, creștem intrarea cu încorporarea relațiilor din graficul cunoștințelor generale ConceptNet. Ca rezultat, sistemul nostru obține performanțe de ultimă oră cu o precizie de 83,95% pe datele oficiale de testare. Codul este disponibil public la < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem za zadatak 11. poleval-2018: kompresija mašine koristeći znanje Commonsense. Koristimo tri-putne pozorne mreže (TriAN) za model interakcije između prolaza, pitanja i odgovora. Da bi uključili znanje zajedničkog smisla, povećali smo ulaz sa vezom uključenim iz grafika općeg znanja ConceptNeta. Kao rezultat toga, naš sistem postiže obavljanje stanja umjetnosti sa preciznošću 83,95% na službenim testovima. Kod je javno dostupan na < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය සම්වෙව්ල-2018 වැඩ 11 ගැන විස්තර කරනවා: මැෂින් සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණ අපි මාර්ගය, ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ උත්තරය අතර සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් තුනක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. සාමාන්\u200dය දන්නවය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය දන්නවය සංවිධානයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ඇතුළුම් සමග ස ඉතින්, අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණ දත්තේ තියෙන්නේ 83.95% සිද්ධතාවක් තියෙනවා. කෝඩ් සාර්වාධික විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශයි <at https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa nidaamka SemEval-2018 shaqo 11: Heshiiska mashiinka ee isticmaalka aqoonta heshiiska. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa Internetka Iswidishka (TriAN) ee saddex wado si aan u sameynno xiriirka baasabka, su'aalaha iyo jawaabaha. Si aan ugu soo qorno aqoonta shirkadda, waxaynu ku dareynaa qalabka xiriirka ka soo baxa sawirka aqoonta guud ee ConceptNet. Sababtaas darteed nidaamkayagu wuxuu sameynayaa xaaladda farshaxanka oo 83.95% si rasmi ah oo ku saabsan macluumaadka imtixaanka rasmiga ah. Codeynta waxaa si bayaan ah looga helaa < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system för SemEval-2018 Uppgift 11: Maskinförståelse med Commonsense Knowledge. Vi använder Trevägs Attentive Networks (TriAN) för att modellera interaktioner mellan passagen, frågan och svaren. För att inkorporera allmännyttig kunskap utökar vi input med relationsinbäddning från grafen över allmännyttig kunskap ConceptNet. Som ett resultat uppnår vårt system toppmoderna prestanda med 83,95% noggrannhet på de officiella testdata. Koden är offentligt tillgänglig på < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 செயல் 11: இயந்திரம் முடிவு நாம் மூன்று வழி இணைப்பு வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்தி கடவுச்செல், கேள்வி மற்றும் விடைகளுக்கும் இடையே உள்ள இடைமுற To incorporate commonsense knowledge, we augment the input with relation embedding from the graph of general knowledge ConceptNet.  முடிவுக்கு, எங்கள் கணினியில் 83. 95% சரியான சோதனை தரவின் நிலையை பெறுகிறது. < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری سیسٹم کو سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۱۱ کے لئے بیان کرتا ہے: کمنسس علم کے استعمال سے ماشین کمپرینس. ہم تین طریقے اچھی نیٹورک (TriAN) کو مسافر، سوال اور جواب کے درمیان موڈل کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہمیں معمولی علم میں شامل کرنا ہے، ہم اسے معمولی علم ConceptNet کے گراف سے پیدا ہونے کے ساتھ اضافہ کریں گے. نتیجہ سے، ہماری سیسٹم نے 83.95% سطحی تست ڈیٹوں پر قابل تحقیق حاصل کیا ہے. <پر کڈ ظاہر طور پر موجود ہے https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >', 'uz': "This paper describes our system for SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge.  Name Komponentsiya haqida qo'shish uchun biz umumiy maʼlumot ConceptNet grafikdan kiritilgan murojaat tarkibini qo'shimiz. Bu natijada, bizning tizimmiz rasm sinov maʼlumotlarida 83.95% aniqligini bajaradi. Kodlash publikasi <da mavjud emas https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống của chúng ta với SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 11: Machine Compention using Commonsy Knowledge. Chúng tôi sử dụng mạng Bảo vệ Ba phương (Trian) để mô tả giao tiếp giữa đoạn, câu hỏi và câu trả lời. Để nhập vào kiến thức thông thường, chúng tôi tăng thêm các nhập vào các mối quan hệ được nhập từ đồ thị kiến thức chung, ConcPTNet. Kết quả là hệ thống của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả tối tân Mật mã đã được công khai https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc -̀.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system til SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Maskinforståelse ved hjælp af Commonsense Knowledge. Vi bruger Trevejs Attentive Networks (TriAN) til at modellere interaktioner mellem passagen, spørgsmål og svar. For at indarbejde almindelig viden, øger vi input med relation integrering fra grafen over almindelig viden ConceptNet. Som følge heraf opnår vores system state-of-the-art ydeevne med 83,95% nøjagtighed på de officielle testdata. Koden er offentligt tilgængelig på < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата система за задача 11: Разбиране на машините с помощта на общоприето знание. Използваме Трипосочни Внимателни Мрежи (ТриАН), за да моделираме взаимодействията между пасажа, въпроса и отговорите. За да включим общоприетото знание, ние увеличаваме входа с вграждане на връзката от графиката на общите знания Концептнет. В резултат на това нашата система постига най-съвременни резултати с 83,95% точност на официалните тестови данни. Кодът е публично достъпен на адрес < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'nl': 'Dit document beschrijft ons systeem voor SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. We gebruiken Three-way Attentive Networks (TriAN) om interacties tussen passage, vraag en antwoord te modelleren. Om gezond verstand te integreren, breiden we de input uit met relatiebedden uit de grafiek van algemene kennis ConceptNet. Hierdoor bereikt ons systeem state-of-the-art prestaties met 83,95% nauwkeurigheid op de officiële testgegevens. Code is openbaar beschikbaar op < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem kita untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Kompresi Mesin menggunakan Pengetahuan Komunis. Kami menggunakan Three-way Attentive Networks (TriAN) untuk model interaksi antara laluan, pertanyaan dan jawaban. Untuk memasukkan pengetahuan umum, kita menambah input dengan hubungan yang memasukkan dari grafik pengetahuan umum ConceptNet. Sebagai hasilnya, sistem kita mencapai prestasi terbaik dengan akurasi 83,95% pada data ujian resmi. Code is publicly available at < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser System für SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. Wir verwenden Three-way Attentive Networks (TriAN), um Interaktionen zwischen Passage, Frage und Antwort zu modellieren. Um gesundes Wissen zu integrieren, erweitern wir den Input um Relationen Einbettung aus dem Graphen des Allgemeinwissens ConceptNet. Dadurch erreicht unser System State-of-the-Art Performance mit 83,95% Genauigkeit auf den offiziellen Testdaten. Code ist öffentlich verfügbar unter < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18임무11: 상식지식을 사용하여 기계를 이해하는 시스템을 묘사하였다.Dell은 기사, 질문, 답변 간의 상호 작용을 시뮬레이션하기 위해 TriAn(TriAn)을 사용합니다.상식 지식을 융합시키기 위해 우리는 일반 지식 개념망의 그림에 관계를 삽입하여 입력을 늘린다.따라서 우리 시스템은 가장 선진적인 성능에 도달했고 정부 테스트 데이터의 정확도는 83.95%에 달했다.코드는 <https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc>.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را برای تابع ۱۱ سال ۲۰۱۸ توصیف می\u200cکند: تزریق ماشین با استفاده از دانش کمونس. ما از شبکه های سه راه مواظب (TriAN) برای مدل تعاملات بین مسیر، سوال و جواب استفاده می کنیم. برای شامل علم معمولی، ما وارد آن را با ارتباطی که از گراف مشخص علم عمومی افزایش می\u200cدهیم. به نتیجه، سیستم ما با دقیق 83.95 درصد روی داده های آزمایش رسمی برسد. کد عمومی در < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc .', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu kwa ajili ya SemEval-2018 Kazi 11: Matumizi ya Mashiniki kwa kutumia Ujuzi wa Mashirika. Tunatumia Mtandao wa Mtandao wa Utatu (TriAN) kutengeneza mahusiano kati ya njia, maswali na majibu. Ili kuingiza maarifa ya jumuiya, tunaongeza kituo hicho kinachohusiana na mahusiano yanayoingia kwenye picha ya maarifa ya jumla ya Mtandao wa Mtandao. Matokeo yake, mfumo wetu unafanikiwa utendaji wa hali ya sanaa kwa asilimia 83.95 kuhakikisha takwimu rasmi za jaribio. Sheria inapatikana hadharani kwa < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň sistemimizi SemEval-2018 Taýgyzy 11: Maşynyň birleşigini Commonsense Bilgi ulanýan hasaplaýar. Biz geçiş, sorag we jogaplar arasyndaky temaslary örneklemek üçin üç yönden Tahlikeli Açlar (TriAN) ulanýarys. Çoklu duygusal bilgi birleştirmek için, genel bilim ConceptNet grafisinden girişini arttırıyoruz. Sonuçta biziň sistemamyz resmi testiň maglumatynda 83.95% dogry ýagdaýyny tapylýar. _Mazmunlar https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel vir SemEval-2018 taak 11: Masjienkomprehensie gebruik Commonsense kennis. Ons gebruik drie-weg aandagbare netwerke (TriAN) om interaksies te model tussen die pad, vraag en antwoorde. Om gemeenskaplike kennis te inkorporeer, vermeerder ons die invoer met verhouding wat ingesluit is van die graf van algemene kennis ConceptNet. As 'n resultaat, ons stelsel bereik staat-van-kunstenaar met 83,95% presies op die offisiele toets data. Kode is openlik beskikbaar by < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin tonë për SemEval-2018 Task 11: Comprehension Machine duke përdorur njohuritë e përbashkëta. Ne përdorim rrjetet tre-drejtore tërheqëse (TriAN) për të modeluar ndërveprimet midis kalimit, pyetjeve dhe përgjigjeve. Për të përfshirë njohuri të përbashkët, ne shtojmë input me marrëdhënie të përfshirë nga grafiku i njohurisë së përgjithshme ConceptNet. Si rezultat, sistemi ynë arrin performancën më të lartë me 83.95% saktësi në të dhënat zyrtare të testit. Kodi është në dispozicion publik në < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለSemEval-2018 ስራ 11: የመኪን እውቀት በመጠቀም የሞክራዊ እውቀትን ይናገራል፡፡ የሦስት መንገድ ተሳታፊ መረብ (TriAN) በመግቢያ፣ ጥያቄ እና መልስ መካከል ግንኙነቶችን ለመmodel እንጠይቃለን፡፡ የግንኙነት እውቀት ለማስቀመጥ፣ የውይይት ግንኙነት ከጠቅላላ እውቀት ኮንስፒትተርኔት መግለጫ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ይሄንን ምክንያት ስርዓታችን የዓላማ ግዛት አግኝቷል፡፡ Code https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav za posao 11. za pola Eval-2018: kompresija strojeva koristeći znanje Commonsense. Koristimo trosmjerne pozorne mreže (TriAN) za model interakcija između prolaza, pitanja i odgovora. Da bi uključili znanje zajedničkog smisla, povećali smo ulaz s vezom uključenim iz grafika općeg znanja ConceptNeta. Kao rezultat toga, naš sustav postiže stanje umjetnosti sa preciznošću 83,95% na službenim ispitivanjima. Kod je javno dostupan na < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >', 'hy': 'This paper describes our system for SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge.  Մենք օգտագործում ենք Երեք ուղղությամբ Փորձնական ցանցեր (ՏրիԱն) ուղղության, հարցերի և պատասխանների միջև փոխազդեցության մոդելավորման համար: Որպեսզի ներառենք ընդհանուր գիտելիքը, մենք ավելացնում ենք ներդրումը ընդհանուր գիտելիքի Կոնցեպտենթ գրաֆիկի հետ: Որպես արդյունք, մեր համակարգը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին, որտեղ պաշտոնական փորձարկումների տվյալների ճշգրտությունը կազմում է 8395 տոկոսով: Կոդը հասանելի է https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc ]:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি আমাদের সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের জন্য বর্ণনা করেছে: কমিনসেন্স জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে মেশিন পুনরুদ্ধার করা। আমরা তিনভাবে অ্যাটেন্টিভ নেটওয়ার্ক (ট্রিয়ান) ব্যবহার করি পাস, প্রশ্ন এবং উত্তরের মধ্যে মোডেল করার জন্য। সাধারণ জ্ঞান কনসেপ্টনেটের গ্রাফ থেকে বিভিন্ন সম্পর্কের সাথে যোগাযোগ করার জন্য আমরা যোগ করি। As a result, our system achieves state-of-the-art performance with 83.95% accuracy on the official test data.  <এ প্রকাশ্যে কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >', 'ca': 'Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema de SemEval-2018 Task 11: Comprehension de la màquina utilitzant el coneixement comú. Utilitzem Redes Attentives Tridireccionals (TriAN) per modelar interaccions entre el passatge, la pregunta i les respostes. Per incorporar coneixements comuns, augmentem la entrada amb relació incorporada pel gràfic del coneixement general ConceptNet. Com a resultat, el nostre sistema aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat amb una precisió del 83,95% en les dades oficials de prova. El codi està disponible públicament a < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém pro SemEval-2018 Task 11: Rozumění strojů s využitím Commonsense Knowledge. K modelování interakcí mezi pasáží, otázkou a odpovědí používáme trojcestné pozornostní sítě (TrioN). Pro začlenění znalostí zdravého rozumu rozšíříme vstup o vložení vztahů z grafu obecného znalostí ConceptNet. V důsledku toho náš systém dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu s 83,95% přesností na oficiálních testovacích údajích. Kód je veřejně dostupný na adrese < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi SemEval-2018 ülesande 11 jaoks: masinate mõistmine, kasutades tavateadmisi. Me kasutame kolmesuunalist tähelepanuvõrku (TriAN), et modelleerida läbipääsu, küsimuse ja vastuste vastastikust mõju. Üldmõistlike teadmiste kaasamiseks täiendame sisendit seoste manustamisega üldteadmiste graafikust ConceptNet. Selle tulemusena saavutab meie süsteem kaasaegse jõudluse 83,95% täpsusega ametlikel testiandmetel. Kood on avalikult kättesaadav aadressil < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmäämme SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. Käytämme Three-way Attentive Networks (TriAN) -verkkoja, joilla mallinnetaan kohtien, kysymysten ja vastausten välisiä vuorovaikutuksia. Sisällyttääksemme yleisen järkevyyden tiedon lisäämme syötettä suhteessa upottamalla yleisen tiedon graafista ConceptNet. Tämän seurauksena järjestelmämme saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn 83,95%:n tarkkuudella virallisista testitiedoista. Koodi on julkisesti saatavilla osoitteessa < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt bizim SemEval-2018 Task 11 sistemimizi t…ôsdiql…ôyir: Commonsense Bilim vasit…ôsil…ô maŇüńĪn komprehensiyonu. Biz √ľ√ß yol Attentive Networks (TriAN) il…ô ke√ßiŇü, sual v…ô cevaplar arasńĪndakńĪ bańülantńĪlar modeli √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edirik. Kommunik bilgi birl…ôŇüdirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, genel bilgi ConceptNet grafńĪndan istifad…ô edil…ôn …ôlaq…ôl…ôrl…ô birl…ôŇüdiririk. N√∂vb…ôti olaraq, sistemimiz t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnda 83,95% …ôdal…ôti il…ô istifad…ô ed…ôr. Kod a√ßńĪq-aŇükar faydalanńĪr <at> https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem za pola Eval-2018 zadatak 11: kompresija mašine koristeći znanje Commonsense. Koristimo tri puta Attentive Networks (TriAN) za model interakcija između prolaza, pitanja i odgovora. Da bi uključili znanje zajedničkog smisla, povećali smo ulaz sa vezom uključenim iz grafika općeg znanja ConceptNeta. Kao rezultat toga, naš sistem postiže izvršnost države umjetnosti sa preciznošću 83,95% na službenim testovima. Kod je javno dostupan na < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc - Da.', 'jv': 'Bu peutel munculo sistem keji seminval Awak dhéwé wis nggambar Atentive Network (TriAN) nggo modèl interaksi merupan pasar, question lan gambaran ProgressBarUpdater Yo wis rampung Sistem punika dipoleh-perusahaan liyane dadi, dadi-perusahaan karo Coverage https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >', 'ha': "Bu takardan na bayyana tsarin na'urar da SemEl-2018 Tanin 11: Mashin Comprehension da ake amfani da Cilmi da Commonsense. Tuna amfani da Cikakken Attent Networks uku (TRAN) dõmin mu motsa masu shawara tsakanin tafarki, tambayi da jiban. Dõmin Mu shigar da ilimi na kommuni, za'a ƙara inputan da ka shiga daga graph of General Cilmen ConceptNet. Tayyar da haka, na'asarmu yana sami halin-sanar da 83.95% na taƙaitacce a kan data na jarraba rasmi. Ana iya ƙayyade kode da bayani a < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem za nalogo 11 SemEval-2018: Razumevanje strojev z uporabo splošnega znanja. Za modeliranje interakcij med prehodom, vprašanjem in odgovori uporabljamo trismerne pozornostne mreže (TriAN). Za vključitev splošnega znanja dopolnjujemo vnos z vgradnjo relacij iz grafa splošnega znanja ConceptNet. Zato naš sistem dosega najsodobnejše zmogljivosti z 83,95% natančnostjo uradnih testnih podatkov. Koda je javno dostopna na < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'he': 'This paper describes our system for SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge.  אנו משתמשים ברשתות שלוש כיוונים (TriAN) כדי לדוגמא אינטראקציות בין המעבר, שאלות ותשובות. כדי להכיל ידע משותף, אנו מגדילים את הכניסה עם מערכת יחסים מתוך הגרף של ידע כללי ConceptNet. כתוצאה מכך, המערכת שלנו משיגה ביצועים חדשים עם מדויקת 83.95% על נתוני הבדיקה הרשמיים. קוד זמין לציבור ב < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་SemEval-2018 Task 11:Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge་དེ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསུམ་པ་ཞིག་སྤྱད་ནས་གདོང་འགྲེལ་མཐུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། To incorporate commonsense knowledge, we augment the input with relation embedding from the graph of general knowledge ConceptNet. འོན་ཀྱང་། མ་ལག་གིས་གཞུང་གིས་རྩལ་གནས་སྟངས་ལྟར་མཐའ་ནས་83.95% < https://github.com/intfloat/commonsense-rc >'}
{'en': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12 : The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'ar': 'SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: مهمة استيعاب منطق التفكير', 'es': 'Tarea 12 del SemEval-2018: La tarea de comprensión del razonamiento de argumentos', 'fr': 'SemEval-2018 Tâche 12\xa0: La tâche de compréhension du raisonnement des arguments', 'pt': 'SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: A Tarefa de Compreensão de Raciocínio de Argumentos', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018„āŅ„āĻ„āĮ12 ÔľöŤ≠įŤęĖ„Āģśé®ŤęĖÁźÜŤß£„āŅ„āĻ„āĮ', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018śõį:SemEval-2018ŤģļÁźÜŤß£', 'hi': 'Semeval-2018 कार्य 12: तर्क तर्क समझ कार्य', 'ru': 'Задача SemEval-2018 12: Задача понимания аргументации', 'ga': 'SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: An Tasc Tuisceana Réasúnuithe Argóint', 'hu': 'SemEval-2018 feladat 12: Az érvelés indokolásával kapcsolatos átfogó feladat', 'ka': 'SemEval-2018 დავალება 12: არგუმენტის მიზეზი კომპრენციის დავალება', 'kk': 'SemEval-2018 тапсырма 12: Аргументтің түсініктерін шешу тапсырмасы', 'lt': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'ms': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'el': 'Καθήκον 12: Το έργο κατανόησης επιχειρημάτων', 'ml': 'സെമ്', 'it': "SemEval-2018 Task 12: Il compito di comprensione della ragione dell'argomento", 'mk': 'SemEval-2018 задача 12: задачата за размислување за разбирање', 'no': 'SemEval-2018 oppgåve 12: Argumentet for å utføra komprehensingsoppgåve', 'ro': 'SemEval-2018 Sarcina 12: Sarcina de înțelegere a argumentelor', 'mt': 'Kompitu 12 ta’ SemEval-2018: Il-Kompitu ta’ Komprensjoni li Jaġġustifika l-Argument', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reason Comprehension Task', 'sr': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'pl': 'SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Zadanie rozumienia argumentów', 'si': 'සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 12: ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂන් වැඩ', 'so': 'SemEval-2018 Shaqada 12: Shaqada kaalmada', 'sv': 'SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: Argumentresonemang Förståelseuppgift', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 12: குறிப்பு முடிப்பு பணி', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 12: Argument Reading completion Vazifa', 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ bắt đầu Thuyết âm mưu', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Задачата за разбиране на аргументите', 'da': 'SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Argumentbegrundelse Forståelse Opgave', 'hr': 'Zadnji zadatak 12:', 'id': 'SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Argumen Menyebabkan Tugas Pemahaman', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 퀘스트 12: 논증 추리 이해 퀘스트', 'sw': 'SemEval-2018 Kazi 12: Kazi ya Msingi Kusoma Uhalalishaji', 'nl': 'SemEval-2018 Taak 12: De Argument Redening Comprehension Taak', 'tr': 'SemEval-2018 Görev 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'af': 'SemEval-2018 Opdrag 12: Die Argument Oorsaak Opdrag', 'de': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'hy': 'The Around Reason', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 12:', 'fa': 'ماموریت ۱۲۰۲ نیم Eval-۲۰۰۸: کاری که باعث دلایل تأثیر توسعه است', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Görev 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'bn': 'SemEval-2018 কাজ ১২: আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরায় সম্পূর্ণ কাজ', 'bs': 'Zadnji zadatak 12:', 'ca': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'cs': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'fi': 'SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: Argumentin järkeilyn ymmärtäminen Tehtävä', 'et': 'SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 12: Argumenti põhjendamise ülesanne', 'sq': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'jv': 'Sample rate', 'sk': 'SemEval-2018 Naloga 12: Naloga razumevanja argumentov', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'he': 'משימה 12: משימה הגיונית להבינה', 'bo': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task'}
{'en': 'A natural language argument is composed of a claim as well as reasons given as premises for the claim. The warrant explaining the reasoning is usually left implicit, as it is clear from the context and common sense. This makes a comprehension of arguments easy for humans but hard for machines. This paper summarizes the first shared task on argument reasoning comprehension. Given a premise and a claim along with some topic information, the goal was to automatically identify the correct warrant among two candidates that are plausible and lexically close, but in fact imply opposite claims. We describe the dataset with 1970 instances that we built for the task, and we outline the 21 computational approaches that participated, most of which used neural networks. The results reveal the complexity of the task, with many approaches hardly improving over the random accuracy of about 0.5. Still, the best observed accuracy (0.712) underlines the principle feasibility of identifying warrants. Our analysis indicates that an inclusion of external knowledge is key to reasoning comprehension.', 'ar': 'تتكون حجة اللغة الطبيعية من مطالبة بالإضافة إلى الأسباب المقدمة كمقدمات للادعاء. عادة ما يتم ترك الأمر الذي يشرح المنطق ضمنيًا ، لأنه واضح من السياق والحس السليم. هذا يجعل فهم الحجج سهلاً على البشر ولكنه صعب على الآلات. تلخص هذه الورقة أول مهمة مشتركة حول فهم التفكير المنطقي. نظرًا لفرضية ومطالبة جنبًا إلى جنب مع بعض معلومات الموضوع ، كان الهدف هو التعرف تلقائيًا على الأمر الصحيح بين اثنين من المرشحين المقبولين والقريبين من الناحية اللغوية ، ولكن في الواقع ينطويان على ادعاءات معاكسة. نصف مجموعة البيانات التي تحتوي على 1970 مثيلات قمنا ببنائها للمهمة ، وقمنا بتحديد الخطوط العريضة لـ 21 نهجًا حسابيًا شاركت ، ومعظمها استخدم الشبكات العصبية. تكشف النتائج مدى تعقيد المهمة ، مع وجود العديد من الأساليب بالكاد تتحسن على الدقة العشوائية البالغة 0.5 تقريبًا. ومع ذلك ، فإن أفضل دقة تمت ملاحظتها (0.712) تؤكد على الجدوى الأساسية لتحديد أوامر الاعتقال. يشير تحليلنا إلى أن إدراج المعرفة الخارجية هو مفتاح فهم التفكير.', 'pt': 'Um argumento de linguagem natural é composto de uma afirmação, bem como razões dadas como premissas para a afirmação. A justificativa para explicar o raciocínio geralmente é deixada implícita, pois fica claro a partir do contexto e do senso comum. Isso torna a compreensão dos argumentos fácil para os humanos, mas difícil para as máquinas. Este artigo resume a primeira tarefa compartilhada na compreensão do raciocínio argumentativo. Dada uma premissa e uma afirmação juntamente com algumas informações do tópico, o objetivo era identificar automaticamente a garantia correta entre dois candidatos que são plausíveis e lexicalmente próximos, mas na verdade implicam em afirmações opostas. Descrevemos o conjunto de dados com 1970 instâncias que construímos para a tarefa e descrevemos as 21 abordagens computacionais que participaram, a maioria delas usando redes neurais. Os resultados revelam a complexidade da tarefa, com muitas abordagens dificilmente melhorando em relação à precisão aleatória de cerca de 0,5. Ainda assim, a melhor precisão observada (0,712) reforça a principal viabilidade de identificação de garantias. Nossa análise indica que a inclusão do conhecimento externo é fundamental para a compreensão do raciocínio.', 'es': 'Un argumento de lenguaje natural se compone de una afirmación, así como de las razones dadas como premisas para la reclamación. La orden que explica el razonamiento suele dejarse implícita, como queda claro por el contexto y el sentido común. Esto hace que la comprensión de los argumentos sea fácil para los humanos, pero difícil para las máquinas. Este artículo resume la primera tarea compartida sobre la comprensión del razonamiento argumentativo. Dada una premisa y una afirmación junto con cierta información sobre el tema, el objetivo era identificar automáticamente la orden correcta entre dos candidatos que son plausibles y léxicamente cercanos, pero que de hecho implican afirmaciones opuestas. Describimos el conjunto de datos con 1970 instancias que creamos para la tarea y describimos los 21 enfoques computacionales que participaron, la mayoría de los cuales usaron redes neuronales. Los resultados revelan la complejidad de la tarea, ya que muchos enfoques apenas mejoran con respecto a la precisión aleatoria de aproximadamente 0.5. Aun así, la mejor precisión observada (0.712) subraya la viabilidad principal de identificar las garantías. Nuestro análisis indica que la inclusión de conocimientos externos es clave para la comprensión del razonamiento.', 'fr': "Un argument en langage naturel est composé d'une revendication ainsi que de motifs invoqués en tant que prémisses de la réclamation. Le mandat expliquant le raisonnement est généralement laissé implicite, comme cela ressort clairement du contexte et du bon sens. Cela rend la compréhension des arguments facile pour les humains mais difficile pour les machines. Cet article résume la première tâche partagée sur la compréhension du raisonnement des arguments. Compte tenu d'une prémisse et d'une revendication ainsi que de quelques informations sur le sujet, l'objectif était d'identifier automatiquement le bon mandat parmi deux candidats qui sont plausibles et lexicalement proches, mais qui impliquent en fait des affirmations opposées. Nous décrivons le jeu de données avec 1970 instances que nous avons créées pour cette tâche, et nous décrivons les 21 approches informatiques qui ont participé, dont la plupart utilisaient des réseaux de neurones. Les résultats révèlent la complexité de la tâche, de nombreuses approches ne s'améliorant guère par rapport à la précision aléatoire d'environ 0,5. Néanmoins, la meilleure précision observée (0,712) souligne la faisabilité principale de l'identification des bons de souscription. Notre analyse indique que l'inclusion de connaissances externes est essentielle à la compréhension du raisonnement.", 'ja': '自然言語の議論は、請求の前提として与えられた理由だけでなく、請求によって構成されます。 文脈と常識から明らかなように、推論を説明する令状は通常、暗黙のうちに残されています。 これにより、議論の理解は人間にとっては容易であるが、機械にとっては難しい。 この論文では、推論理解に関する最初の共有タスクをまとめた。 いくつかのトピック情報と共に前提と主張を考慮すると、妥当であり、語彙的に近いが、実際には反対の主張を意味する2つの候補者の間で正しい令状を自動的に特定することが目標となりました。 タスクのために構築した1970年のインスタンスを使ってデータセットを説明し、参加した21の計算アプローチを概説します。そのほとんどはニューラルネットワークを使用しています。 結果は、多くのアプローチが約0.5のランダムな精度よりもほとんど改善されない、タスクの複雑さを明らかにします。 それでも、最良の観察された精度（ 0.712 ）は、ワラントを特定する原則の実現可能性を強調している。 私たちの分析によると、外部の知識を含めることが推論理解の鍵であることが示されています。', 'zh': '自然语言论以权利及为索赔前提与之。 说推理者权证常隐也,以上下文识见也。 使知论之于人易,而于机器之于人难。 本文总结论理解首共同任务。 给定一前提与一声明及主题信息者,两选人中自动识别正授权,此二选人理也,而近于词汇,而实反其声。 余以1970例述数集,并概述参21种算法,其中多用神经网络。 卒揭其复杂性,随机精度,殆不过0.5。 虽然,察之至准确度(0.712)强识股权证之道可行性。 吾之分析表明,外者,理之要也。', 'ru': 'Аргумент в пользу естественного языка состоит из претензии, а также причин, приведенных в качестве основания для претензии. Ордер, объясняющий мотивировку, обычно оставляется неявным, поскольку это ясно из контекста и здравого смысла. Это делает понимание аргументов легким для людей, но трудным для машин. В настоящем документе кратко излагается первая общая задача, касающаяся понимания аргументации. Учитывая предпосылку и претензию наряду с некоторой тематической информацией, цель заключалась в автоматическом определении правильного ордера среди двух кандидатов, которые являются правдоподобными и лексически близкими, но фактически подразумевают противоположные претензии. Мы описываем набор данных с 1970 экземплярами, которые мы построили для этой задачи, и мы описываем 21 вычислительный подход, который участвовал, большинство из которых использовали нейронные сети. Результаты показывают сложность задачи, при этом многие подходы едва ли улучшаются по сравнению со случайной точностью около 0,5. Тем не менее наилучшая наблюдаемая точность (0,712) подчеркивает принципиальную осуществимость идентификации ордеров. Наш анализ показывает, что включение внешних знаний является ключом к пониманию рассуждений.', 'hi': 'एक प्राकृतिक भाषा तर्क एक दावे के साथ-साथ दावे के लिए परिसर के रूप में दिए गए कारणों से बना है। तर्क की व्याख्या करने वाले वारंट को आमतौर पर निहित छोड़ दिया जाता है, क्योंकि यह संदर्भ और सामान्य ज्ञान से स्पष्ट है। यह मनुष्यों के लिए तर्कों की समझ को आसान बनाता है लेकिन मशीनों के लिए कठिन है। यह पेपर तर्क तर्क समझ पर पहले साझा कार्य को सारांशित करता है। कुछ विषय की जानकारी के साथ एक आधार और दावे को देखते हुए, लक्ष्य स्वचालित रूप से दो उम्मीदवारों के बीच सही वारंट की पहचान करना था जो प्रशंसनीय और लेक्सिकल रूप से बंद हैं, लेकिन वास्तव में विपरीत दावों का मतलब है। हम 1970 के उदाहरणों के साथ डेटासेट का वर्णन करते हैं जो हमने कार्य के लिए बनाया था, और हम भाग लेने वाले 21 कम्प्यूटेशनल दृष्टिकोणों को रेखांकित करते हैं, जिनमें से अधिकांश ने तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग किया था। परिणाम कार्य की जटिलता को प्रकट करते हैं, कई दृष्टिकोणों के साथ शायद ही लगभग 0.5 की यादृच्छिक सटीकता में सुधार होता है। फिर भी, सबसे अच्छी देखी गई सटीकता (0.712) वारंट की पहचान करने की सिद्धांत व्यवहार्यता को रेखांकित करती है। हमारा विश्लेषण इंगित करता है कि बाहरी ज्ञान का समावेश तर्क समझ की कुंजी है।', 'ga': 'Tá argóint teanga nádúrtha comhdhéanta d’éileamh chomh maith leis na cúiseanna a thugtar mar áitribh don éileamh. Fágtar an barántas a mhíníonn an réasúnaíocht intuigthe de ghnáth, mar is léir ón gcomhthéacs agus ón tuiscint choiteann. Fágann sé seo go bhfuil tuiscint ar argóintí éasca do dhaoine ach deacair do mheaisíní. Déanann an páipéar seo achoimre ar an gcéad tasc comhroinnte ar thuiscint ar réasúnaíocht argóinte. I bhfianaise bonn agus éilimh chomh maith le roinnt faisnéise ábhair, ba é an sprioc a bhí ann ná an barántas ceart a aithint go huathoibríoch i measc beirt iarrthóirí atá sochreidte agus gar ó thaobh an fhoclóra de, ach a thugann le tuiscint i ndáiríre na héilimh chodarsnaíocha. Déanaimid cur síos ar an tacar sonraí le 1970 cás a thógamar don tasc, agus tugaimid breac-chuntas ar na 21 cur chuige ríomhaireachtúil a ghlac páirt, ar bhain an chuid is mó díobh úsáid as líonraí néaracha. Léiríonn na torthaí castacht an taisc, agus is ar éigean a thagann feabhas ar go leor cur chuige thar chruinneas randamach de thart ar 0.5. Mar sin féin, cuireann an cruinneas is fearr a breathnaíodh (0.712) béim ar an bprionsabal indéantachta chun barántais a shainaithint. Léiríonn ár n-anailís go bhfuil cuimsiú an eolais sheachtraigh ríthábhachtach chun an réasúnaíocht a thuiscint.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvű érv egy követelésből és a követelés alapjául szolgáló indokokból áll. Az érvelést magyarázó parancs általában hallgatólagos marad, mivel a kontextusból és a józan észből világos. Ez megkönnyíti az érvek megértését az emberek számára, de nehéz a gépek számára. Ez a tanulmány összefoglalja az érvelés érvelésének első megosztott feladatát. Egy előfeltétel és egy követelés, valamint néhány témaköri információ alapján a cél az volt, hogy automatikusan azonosítsa a helyes parancsot két olyan jelölt között, amelyek valójában valószínűleg közel állnak, de valójában ellentétes követelésekre utalnak. A feladathoz készített 1970-es példányokkal ismertetjük az adatkészletet, és felvázoljuk a 21 résztvevő számítástechnikai megközelítést, melyek többsége neurális hálózatokat használt. Az eredmények feltárják a feladat összetettségét, sok megközelítés alig javul a véletlenszerű pontosság körülbelül 0,5. Mindazonáltal a legjobb megfigyelt pontosság (0,712) hangsúlyozza a parancsok azonosításának elvi megvalósíthatóságát. Elemzésünk azt mutatja, hogy a külső ismeretek bevonása kulcsfontosságú az érvelés megértéséhez.', 'ka': 'თავისუფალური ენის არგუმენტი იქნება საჭირო და მიზეზები, რომლებიც საჭირო საჭირო პირველი. დაწყვეტი, რომელიც აღწერს რაოდენობას, უბრალოდ დატოვებულია იმისთვის, რადგან ეს კონტექსტზე და საერთო სიგრძნობისგან წარმოადგენა. ეს ადამიანებისთვის ადამიანებისთვის ადამიანებისთვის ადამიანებისთვის ადამიანებისთვის, მაგრამ მაქინებისთვის რთული. ეს დოკუმენტი აღმოჩენა პირველი გაყოფილი რაოდენობა არგუმენტის აღმოჩენება. მიზეზი იყო, რომ ორი კანდიდენტების მარტივი და ლექსიკურად დახურებულია, მაგრამ ფაქტიურად განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრება. 1970 წლის მონაცემების შესახებ, რომლებიც ჩვენ დავყენეთ რაოდენობისთვის, ჩვენ აღწერეთ 21 კომპუტაციალური შესახებ, რომლებიც ჩვენ დავყენეთ, ბევრი რაოდენობის ნ წარმოდგენები აღმოჩნდება რაოდენობის კომპლექსიტება, რომელიც ბევრი წარმოდგენები არაფერად უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტივად 0,5-ის გამოსახულებელი წარმო მაგრამ ყველაზე საუკეთესო დააჩვენებული სიმართლე (0.712) უფრო დააჩვენებულია პრინქტის შესაძლებელობას, რომელიც იდენტიფიკაციის შესაძლებელობა. ჩვენი ანალიზია, რომ გარეშე ცნობილების შეყვარება კლძფერია გარეშე განსხვავებას.', 'lt': 'Gamtinis kalbinis argument as susideda iš prašymo ir priežas čių, pateiktų kaip pretenzijos pagrindas. Įsakymas paaiškinti motyvą paprastai paliekamas netiesioginiu, nes tai aiškiai matyti iš konteksto ir bendros proto. Tai palengvina argumentų supratimą žmonėms, bet sunku mašinoms. Šiame dokumente apibendrinama pirmoji bendra užduotis, susijusi su argument ų pagrindimo supratimu. Atsižvelgiant į prielaidą ir teiginį kartu su tam tikra temine informacija, tikslas buvo automatiškai nustatyti teisingą orderį tarp dviejų kandidatų, kurie yra patikimi ir lexiškai artimi, tačiau iš tikrųjų reiškia priešingus teiginius. Mes apibūdiname duomenų rinkinį su 1970 m. atvejais, kuriuos sukūrėme užduočiai atlikti, ir apibūdiname 21 skaičiavimo metodus, kurie dalyvavo, iš kurių dauguma naudojo nervinius tinklus. Rezultatai atskleidžia užduoties sudėtingumą, daugelis metodų beveik nesigerina, palyginti su atsitiktiniu tikslumu apie 0,5. Vis dėlto geriausias nustatytas tikslumas (0,712) pabrėžia principą, kad galima nustatyti orderius. Our analysis indicates that an inclusion of external knowledge is key to reasoning comprehension.', 'el': 'Ένα επιχείρημα φυσικής γλώσσας αποτελείται από έναν ισχυρισμό καθώς και από λόγους που αναφέρονται ως προϋποθέσεις για τον ισχυρισμό. Το ένταλμα που εξηγεί την αιτιολογία παραμένει συνήθως σιωπηρό, καθώς είναι σαφές από το πλαίσιο και την κοινή λογική. Αυτό καθιστά την κατανόηση των επιχειρημάτων εύκολη για τους ανθρώπους αλλά δύσκολη για τις μηχανές. Η παρούσα εργασία συνοψίζει το πρώτο κοινό έργο σχετικά με την κατανόηση της επιχειρηματολογικής. Με δεδομένη μια προϋπόθεση και μια αξίωση μαζί με ορισμένες πληροφορίες σχετικά με το θέμα, ο στόχος ήταν να εντοπιστεί αυτόματα το σωστό ένταλμα μεταξύ δύο υποψηφίων που είναι εύλογοι και λεξικά κοντά, αλλά στην πραγματικότητα υπονοούν αντίθετες αξιώσεις. Περιγράφουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων με τις περιπτώσεις 1970 που κατασκευάσαμε για την εργασία, και περιγράφουμε τις 21 υπολογιστικές προσεγγίσεις που συμμετείχαν, οι περισσότερες από τις οποίες χρησιμοποίησαν νευρωνικά δίκτυα. Τα αποτελέσματα αποκαλύπτουν την πολυπλοκότητα της εργασίας, με πολλές προσεγγίσεις να δύσκολα βελτιώνονται σε σχέση με την τυχαία ακρίβεια περίπου 0,5. Ωστόσο, η καλύτερη παρατηρούμενη ακρίβεια (0.712) υπογραμμίζει την αρχή της δυνατότητας προσδιορισμού των εντάλματων. Η ανάλυσή μας δείχνει ότι η συμπερίληψη εξωτερικής γνώσης είναι το κλειδί για την κατανόηση της λογικής.', 'ms': 'Argumen bahasa semulajadi terdiri dari tuntutan dan sebab yang diberikan sebagai tempat untuk tuntutan. Warrant yang menjelaskan alasan biasanya ditinggalkan secara implicit, kerana ia jelas dari konteks dan akal biasa. Ini membuat pemahaman argumen mudah bagi manusia tetapi sukar untuk mesin. This paper summarizes the first shared task on argument reasoning comprehension.  Given a premise and a claim along with some topic information, the goal was to automatically identify the correct warrant among two candidates that are plausible and lexically close, but in fact imply opposite claims.  Kami menggambarkan set data dengan 1970 contoh yang kami bina untuk tugas ini, dan kami menggambarkan 21 pendekatan komputasi yang berpartisipasi, yang sebahagian besar menggunakan rangkaian saraf. Hasilnya mengungkapkan kompleksiti tugas, dengan banyak pendekatan hampir tidak meningkat melalui ketepatan rawak kira-kira 0.5. Namun, ketepatan terbaik yang diperhatikan (0.712) menandakan prinsip kemudahan pengenalan waran. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa penyelesaian pengetahuan luar adalah kunci untuk memahami alasan.', 'mk': 'Природен јазички аргумент се состои од тврдеое како и причините дадени како простори за тврдеоето. Наредбата за објаснување на размислувањето обично останува имплицитна, бидејќи е јасно од контекстот и здравиот разум. Ова го олеснува разбирањето на аргументите за луѓето, но тешко за машините. Овој документ ја сумира првата заедничка задача за размислување на аргументите разбирање. Со оглед на претпоставката и тврдењето заедно со некои темски информации, целта беше автоматски да се идентификува вистинскиот налог меѓу двајца кандидати кои се веројатни и лексички блиски, но всушност имплицираат спротивни тврдења. Го опишуваме податоците со 1970-те случаи кои ги изградивме за задачата, и ги опишуваме 21 компјутерски пристапи кои учествуваа, од кои повеќето користеа нервни мрежи. Резултатите ја откриваат комплексноста на задачата, со многу пристапи едвај се подобруваат поради случајната точност од околу 0,5. Сепак, најдобрата набљудена точност (0,712) ја истакнува принципот на физибилност на идентификувањето на налогите. Нашата анализа покажува дека вклучувањето на надворешното знаење е клучно за размислување за разбирање.', 'kk': 'Түзіндік тіл аргументі сұрақтан жазылады, және сұрақтар үшін сұрақтар ретінде. Комментарияны түсіндіру үшін кәдімгі мәлімет мен жалпы сезімдерден тазалады. Бұл адамдар үшін аргументтердің түсінігін оңай түсіндіреді, бірақ машиналар үшін қиын түсіндіреді. Бұл қағаз аргументтің түсініктемесінде бірінші ортақ тапсырманы жазып береді. Кейбір тақырыпты мәліметті бірге премиз және сұрақ берген болса, мақсат екі кандидаттар арасындағы дұрыс орранды автоматты түрде анықтауға болады. Бірақ шындықтан қарсы жағдайды анықтауға болады. Біз тапсырма үшін құрылған деректер жинағын 1970 жылдың мәселелерімен таңдап, 21 есептеу жағдайларын таңдап, олардың көпшілігі невралды желіктерді қолданды. Нәтижелер тапсырманың комплексілігін көрсетеді. Көпшіліктері 0,5 деген кездейсоқ дұрыстығын жақсартуға тиіс емес. Бірақ, ең жақсы көрінетін дұрыс (0, 712) бағдарламаларды анықтау мүмкіндігін негіздейді. Біздің анализиямыз сыртқы білімдерді қосу үшін түсінікті түсініктіру үшін түсінікті.', 'it': "Un argomento di linguaggio naturale è composto da un reclamo e da motivi forniti come premessa per il reclamo. Il mandato che spiega il ragionamento è solitamente lasciato implicito, come risulta dal contesto e dal buon senso. Questo rende facile la comprensione degli argomenti per gli esseri umani ma difficile per le macchine. Questo articolo riassume il primo compito condiviso sulla comprensione del ragionamento argomentativo. Data una premessa e una rivendicazione insieme ad alcune informazioni sull'argomento, l'obiettivo era quello di identificare automaticamente il mandato corretto tra due candidati plausibili e lessicamente vicini, ma in realtà implicano rivendicazioni opposte. Descriviamo il dataset con 1970 istanze che abbiamo costruito per il compito, e delineamo i 21 approcci computazionali che hanno partecipato, la maggior parte dei quali ha utilizzato reti neurali. I risultati rivelano la complessità del compito, con molti approcci difficilmente migliorati rispetto alla precisione casuale di circa 0,5. Tuttavia, la migliore accuratezza osservata (0,712) sottolinea il principio di fattibilità dell'identificazione dei warrant. La nostra analisi indica che l'inclusione di conoscenze esterne è fondamentale per la comprensione del ragionamento.", 'ml': 'ഒരു സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ വാദ്യാഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും കാരണങ്ങളില്\u200d കൂടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന വാറണ്ട് സാധാരണയായി ബാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ളതാണ്, അതിന്റെ ക്രമീകരണവും സാധാരണ മനസ്സില്\u200d ന ഇത് മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വാദ്യാഭ്യാസം എളുപ്പമാക്കുന്നു. എന്നാല്\u200d യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ് ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ജോലിയെ കുറിച്ചുകേള്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു. കുറച്ചു വിവരങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടി ഒരു പ്രസ്താവിക്കുകയും ചെയ്തിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം സ്വയം വാറന്റ് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതാണ്.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജോലിക്കുവേണ്ടി പണിത ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന 21 കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടിനുള്ള വഴികളില്\u200d  പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പരിക്രമത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് പ്രാവശ്യങ്ങള്\u200d  എന്നിട്ടും ഏറ്റവും നല്ല നിരീക്ഷിച്ചത് (0. 712) വാറണ്ടുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ നിയമവിധിയെ കുറിച്ച് തട് നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവുകളുടെ ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d താക്കോലാണെന്നാണ്.', 'mt': 'Argument lingwistiku naturali huwa magħmul minn talba kif ukoll minn raġunijiet mogħtija bħala bini għat-talba. Il-mandat li jispjega r-raġunament normalment jitħalla impliċitu, peress li huwa ċar mill-kuntest u s-sens komuni. Dan jagħmel il-fehim tal-argumenti faċli għall-bnedmin iżda diffiċli għall-magni. Dan id-dokument jagħti sommarju tal-ewwel kompitu kondiviż dwar il-fehim tar-raġunament tal-argumenti. Minħabba premessa u pretensjoni flimkien ma’ xi informazzjoni tematika, l-għan kien li jiġi identifikat awtomatikament il-mandat korrett fost żewġ kandidati li huma plawżibbli u lexikament qrib, iżda fil-fatt jimplikaw pretensjonijiet opposti. Aħna niddeskrivu s-sett tad-dejta b’1970 każ li bnijna għall-kompitu, u aħna niddeskrivu l-21 approċċ komputattiv li pparteċipaw, li l-biċċa l-kbira minnhom użaw netwerks newrali. Ir-riżultati juru l-kumplessità tal-kompitu, b’ħafna approċċi bilkemm itejbu fuq il-preċiżjoni aleatorja ta’ madwar 0.5. Still, the best observed accuracy (0.712) underlines the principle feasibility of identifying warrants.  Our analysis indicates that an inclusion of external knowledge is key to reasoning comprehension.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл аргумент нь хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн шалтгаанаас ч мөн хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн шалтгаан юм. Яагаад гэдгийг тодорхойлж байгаа шалтгаан нь ихэвчлэн тодорхойлолтой байдаг. Яагаад гэвэл тодорхойлолтой болон ерөнхий мэдрэмжээс тодорхой байдаг. Энэ нь хүн төрөлхтний аргументын ойлголт амархан боловч машинд хэцүү болдог. Энэ цаас аргументын ойлголтын тухай анхны хуваалтын ажлыг илтгэдэг. Зарим сэдвийн мэдээллээс хамтдаа суурь болон санал өгсөн учраас, зорилго нь хоёр санал дагуулагчдын тухай зөв эрх мэдээллийг автоматаар тодорхойлж чадна. Гэхдээ үнэндээ эсрэг утгыг тодорхойлж чадна. Бид ажил дээр бүтээсэн өгөгдлийн санг 1970 онд тайлбарлаж, 21 тооны тооны арга барилгыг тайлбарлаж, ихэнх нь мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашигладаг. Үүний үр дүнд ажлын төвөгтэй байдлыг харуулдаг. Олон арга зам нь 0.5-ын тохиромжтой тохиромжтой тохиромжтой байдлыг сайжруулж чадахгүй байдаг. Гэвч хамгийн сайн ажиглагдсан тодорхойлолт (0.712) нь тодорхойлолтуудын тодорхойлолтын үндэслэлийг багасгадаг. Бидний шинжилгээ нь гадаад мэдлэгийг нэгтгэх нь ойлголтын ач холбогдол гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Argument języka naturalnego składa się z roszczenia oraz uzasadnienia podanego jako przesłanki roszczenia. Nakaz wyjaśniający uzasadnienie jest zazwyczaj pozostawiany domyślnie, ponieważ wynika to z kontekstu i zdrowego rozsądku. To sprawia, że zrozumienie argumentów jest łatwe dla ludzi, ale trudne dla maszyn. Niniejszy artykuł podsumowuje pierwsze wspólne zadanie dotyczące rozumowania argumentów. Biorąc pod uwagę założenie i roszczenie wraz z pewnymi informacjami tematycznymi, celem było automatyczne zidentyfikowanie właściwego nakazu wśród dwóch kandydatów, którzy są wiarygodni i leksycznie bliscy, ale w rzeczywistości sugerują przeciwne roszczenia. Opisujemy zbiór danych z instancjami 70-tych, które zbudowaliśmy do tego zadania, oraz zarysujemy 21-te podejścia obliczeniowe, które uczestniczyły, z których większość wykorzystywała sieci neuronowe. Wyniki ujawniają złożoność zadania, przy czym wiele podejść ledwo poprawia się nad losową dokładnością około 0,5. Jednak najlepiej obserwowana dokładność (0.712) podkreśla zasadniczą możliwość identyfikacji warrantów. Nasza analiza wskazuje, że włączenie wiedzy zewnętrznej jest kluczem do zrozumienia rozumowania.', 'no': 'Eit naturleg språk- argument er lagt av eit tiltak og grunner gjeven som premisar for tiltak. Kommandoen som forklarer grunnen er vanlegvis igjen implisitt, fordi det er klart frå konteksten og felles sans. Dette gjer ein forståelse av argumenter lett for menneske, men vanskeleg for maskiner. Denne papiret samanserer den første delte oppgåva på argumentforståking. Gjennomsiktig eit premise og eit tvar saman med nokre temainformasjon, var målet å automatisk identifisera den rette orden mellom to kandidatar som er trykkbare og leksisk lukka, men faktisk betyr motsatte tiltak. Vi beskriver datasettet med 1970 instansar som vi bygde for oppgåva, og vi overskriver dei 21 kalkulasjonske tilnærmingane som deltok, dei fleste av dei som brukte neuralnettverket. Resultatet viser kompleksiteten av oppgåva, med mange tilnærmingar som ikkje er tilfeldig å forbetra tilfeldig nøyaktighet i omtrent 0,5. Den beste observerte nøyaktigheten (0,712) understrekar likevel prinsippet for å identifisera garanti. Analysen vårt tyder på at ein inkludering av eksterne kunnskap er nøkkel for å undersøke forståelse.', 'si': 'ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවක් තර්ජනයක් සංවිධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒවගේම හේතුවක් සංවිධානය සඳහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පැහැදිලි වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් තියෙන්නේ, ඒක ප්\u200d මේක මිනිස්සු වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා නමුත් යන්ත්\u200dරයට අමාරුයි. මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරධානය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා. ප්\u200dරධානයක් සහ ප්\u200dරධානයක් සමඟ ප්\u200dරධානයක් තොරතුරු සමඟ, අරක්ෂණය තමයි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානයක් හා ප්\u200dරධානයක් ති අපි දත්ත සෙට්ටුව 1970 වලින් විස්තර කරනවා අපි වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපි පරීක්ෂණයේ 21 ගැන ප්\u200dරවේශය ප්\u200dරවේශය ක ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරකාරයේ සංකෘතිය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්, ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර තාමත්, හොඳම බලාපොරොත්තු සිද්ධතාවය (0.712) වර්ණන්ට් හඳුනාගන්න ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ පුළුවන් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'sr': 'Prirodni jezički argument se sastoji od tvrdnje, kao i razloga koje se daju kao prostora za tvrdnju. Naredba koja objašnjava razum obično ostavlja implicitno, jer je jasno iz konteksta i zajedničkog smisla. To čini razumijevanje argumenata lakom za ljude, ali teško za mašine. Ovaj papir sažetuje prvi zajednički zadatak o razumijevanju argumentacija. S obzirom na premiju i tvrdnju zajedno sa nekim temskim informacijama, cilj je bio da automatski identifikuje pravu nalog među dve kandidate koji su uvjerljivi i leksički bliski, ali zapravo znači suprotne tvrdnje. Opišemo kompletu podataka sa 1970 instancijama koje smo izgradili za taj zadatak, i pokazujemo 21 računalnih pristupa koji su sudjelovali, većina njih je koristila neuralne mreže. Rezultati otkrivaju kompleksnost zadatka, sa mnogim pristupima jedva da se poboljšava nasumična tačnost oko 0,5. Ipak, najbolje posmatrano preciznost (0,712) podseća mogućnost principa identifikacije naloga. Naša analiza ukazuje na to da je uključenje vanjskih znanja ključ razumljivanja razumijevanja.', 'ro': 'Un argument lingvistic natural este compus dintr-o cerere, precum și din motivele prezentate ca premisă pentru cerere. Mandatul care explică raționamentul este de obicei lăsat implicit, așa cum reiese clar din context și din bunul simț. Acest lucru face o înțelegere a argumentelor ușoară pentru oameni, dar dificilă pentru mașini. Această lucrare rezumă prima sarcină comună privind înțelegerea raționamentului argumentelor. Având în vedere o premisă și o pretenție împreună cu unele informații despre subiect, scopul a fost de a identifica automat mandatul corect în rândul a doi candidați care sunt plauzibili și lexical apropiați, dar de fapt implică pretenții opuse. Descriem setul de date cu 1970 de instanțe pe care le-am construit pentru sarcină și conturăm cele 21 de abordări computaționale care au participat, dintre care majoritatea au folosit rețele neurale. Rezultatele dezvăluie complexitatea sarcinii, multe abordări greu îmbunătățind față de acuratețea aleatorie de aproximativ 0,5. Totuși, cea mai bună precizie observată (0,712) subliniază principiul fezabilității identificării mandatelor. Analiza noastră indică faptul că includerea cunoștințelor externe este cheia înțelegerii raționamentului.', 'so': 'Ardayda afka dabiicadda ah waxaa ka mid ah dacwad iyo sababo lagu siiyo sharciga. Ogolaanshaha ku saabsan sababta inta badan waa mid aan waxba tarayn, sababtoo ah waa mid ka muuqanaya daboolka iyo waxyaabaha caadiga ah. Taasi waxay dadka u fududaysaa doodo, laakiin mashiinadaha waa u adag tahay. Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay shaqada ugu horeeya ee la qaybsaday oo ku saabsan heshiiska muran. Markii la siiyo hore iyo dalab la xiriira macluumaad qaarkood, waxaa la jeedaa in uu bilowga u caddeeyo ogolaanshiyaha saxda ah oo ka mid ah labada kandida oo ku dhow waxyaabaha la fali karo, laakiin xaqiiqada ah waxay leedahay cadaawayaasha kala duwan. Waxaynu sawiraynaa macluumaadka ee lagu qoray tusaalooyin 1970 ah oo aan u dhisnay shaqada, waxaana qoraynaa 21 qaabab xisaab ah oo ka qayb galay, inta badan waxay isticmaaleen shabakado neurada ah. The results reveal the complexity of the task, with many approaches hardly improving over the random accuracy of about 0.5.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee, saxda ugu fiican ee la dhawray (0.712) waxay hoos u dhigtaa suurtagalka aqoonsashada ogolaanshaha. Analyskayagu wuxuu muujiyaa in lagu daro aqoonta dibadda ah waa key ku saabsan sababta hoose.', 'ur': 'ایک طبیعی زبان کی حجت ایک ادعا سے ہے اور ایک ادعا کی وجہ سے ہے۔ واورنس کی تعریف کرنے والی واورنس معمولاً غلطی چھوڑی جاتی ہے، جس طرح یہ منظور اور معمولی عقل سے واضح ہے. یہ دلیل لوگوں کے لئے آسان ہے لیکن ماشین کے لئے سخت ہے۔ This paper summarizes the first shared task on argument reasoning comprehension. اور کسی موضوع کی معلومات کے ساتھ ایک نقطہ اور ایک ادعا کے ذریعہ سے موضوع یہ تھا کہ دو کاندینٹوں کے درمیان سچی وارنٹ کی تعریف کرنا تھا جو یقیناً اور زبان سے نزدیک ہیں، لیکن حقیقت میں مخالف ادعا کی تعریف ہے. ہم نے اس کام کے لئے بنائے ہوئے ڈیٹ سٹ کو 1970 مثال کے ساتھ توصیح دیتے ہیں اور ہم نے 21 کامپیوتر کی تقریبیں بیان کی ہیں جن میں سے اکثر لوگ نیورال نیٹ ورک استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ نتیجے کام کی پیچیدگی کو ظاہر کرتے ہیں، بہت سی طریقے کے ساتھ 0.5 کی تصادفیت پر بہتر ہوتی ہیں۔ لیکن بہترین مشاهده دقیقیت (0.712) حکومت شناسایی کے قابلیت کے ذریعے تدبیر کرتا ہے. ہماری تحلیل نشان دیتا ہے کہ بیرونی علم کا شامل سمجھنے کے لئے کلید ہے.', 'sv': 'Ett naturligt språkargument består av ett anspråk samt skäl som anges som grund för anspråket. Den fullmakt som förklarar resonemanget lämnas vanligtvis underförstådd, eftersom det framgår av sammanhanget och sunt förnuft. Detta gör förståelsen av argument enkel för människor men svår för maskiner. Denna uppsats sammanfattar den första gemensamma uppgiften om argumentation resonemang förståelse. Med en premiss och ett anspråk tillsammans med viss ämnesinformation var målet att automatiskt identifiera rätt order bland två kandidater som är rimliga och lexikalt nära, men i själva verket innebär motsatta anspråk. Vi beskriver datauppsättningen med 1970 instanser som vi byggde för uppgiften, och vi beskriver de 21 beräkningsmetoder som deltog, varav de flesta använde neurala nätverk. Resultaten avslöjar uppgiftens komplexitet, med många tillvägagångssätt som knappast förbättras jämfört med den slumpmässiga noggrannheten på ca 0,5. Ändå understryker den bästa observerade noggrannheten (0,712) principen om att identifiera teckningsoptioner. Vår analys indikerar att inkluderande av extern kunskap är nyckeln till resonemangets förståelse.', 'ta': 'ஒரு இயல்பான மொழி வார்ப்பு கூறுதல் மற்றும் காரணங்கள் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட காரணங்கள் கூட. காரணங்களை விளக்கும் வாய்க்குறிப்பு வழக்கமாக இடது புறம் உள்ளது, ஏனெனில் அது சூழல் மற்றும் பொது உணர்வு தெளிவ இது மனிதர்களுக்கு ஒரு வார்த்தைகளை சுலபமாக்குகிறது ஆனால் இயந்திரங்களுக்கு கடினமாக உள்ளது. இந்த தாள் முதல் பகிர்ந்த பணியை விவாதமான கூட்டத்திற்கு சுருக்கும். சில தலைப்புகள் தகவலுடன் ஒரு முன்கூறு மற்றும் ஒரு கேள்வி கொடுத்தால், இலக்கு தானாகவே தானாகவே சரியான வார்த்தையை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் இரண்டு வார் நாம் செயலுக்காக உருவாக்கிய தகவல் அமைப்பை 1970 நிகழ்வுகளுடன் விவரிக்கிறோம். அதில் பெரும்பாலான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்தின முடிவு இன்னும், சிறந்த பார்க்கப்பட்ட சரிவு (0. 712) குறிப்பிடும் வாக்குறிப்பினை குறிப்பிடும். எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி வெளி அறிவின் சேர்ப்பு என்பது குறிப்பிடுகிறது பொருளை குறிப்பிட வேண்டும்.', 'uz': "Asosiy tillar argumenti qo'shish davomida va davom etish uchun qo'llanmagan sabablar. Bu sabablarni aniqlash orqali oddiy narsa emas, chunki bu muhit va umumiy ma'lumotdan clear. Bu insonlarning qismlarini oson qiladi, balki mashinalar uchun qiyin. Bu qogʻoz birinchi boʻlishilgan vazifani bogʻ'liq muammolari uchun hisoblash. Bir necha mavzu maʼlumoti bilan bir davom etilgan paydo bo'lgan paydo bo'lgan ikkita kandida to ʻgʻri vaqtni aniqlash mumkin, lekin aslida boshqa so'zlarni anglatadi. Biz shu vazifa uchun yaratgan 1970 misol bilan maʼlumotlar tarkibini anglatamiz va biz o'rganish 21 kompyuterga murojaat qiladigan narsalarning ko'pchiligini neyural tarmoqlaridan foydalanamiz. @ info: whatsthis Still, the best observed accuracy (0.712) underlines the principle feasibility of identifying warrants.  Analyzerizni tashqi ta'limni qo'shish mumkin, tashqi ta'limni murakkab qilish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Một lý lẽ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên gồm một yêu cầu, cũng như những lý do được đưa ra như cơ sở cho yêu cầu. Cái trát giải thích lý lẽ này thường để lại cái không rõ ràng, rõ ràng từ ngữ cảnh và lẽ thường. Điều này làm cho việc thấu hiểu các lý lẽ dễ dàng đối với con người nhưng khó đối với máy móc. Tờ giấy này tổng hợp nhiệm vụ chia sẻ đầu tiên về hiểu biết lý luận. Dựa vào một giả thuyết và một yêu cầu cùng với một số thông tin về chủ đề, mục tiêu là tự động xác định lệnh bắt giữ đúng giữa hai ứng viên có khả năng và từ ngữ gần gũi, nhưng thực tế ngụ ý ngược lại. Chúng tôi mô tả bộ dữ liệu với bộ mô tả 1970 chúng tôi tạo ra cho nhiệm vụ này, và chúng tôi mô tả phương pháp đo tính toán 21, phần lớn sử dụng mạng thần kinh. Kết quả cho thấy sự phức tạp của nhiệm vụ, với nhiều phương pháp hầu như không cải thiện độ chính xác ngẫu nhiên của khoảng 0.5. Tuy nhiên, sự chính xác quan sát tốt nhất (0.712) vẫn nhấn mạnh khả năng xác định giấy phép. Phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy việc bao gồm kiến thức bên ngoài là mấu chốt để hiểu thấu lý luận.', 'bg': 'Аргументът за естествен език се състои от твърдение, както и от мотивите, изложени като предпоставки за твърдението. Обикновено заповедта, обясняваща мотивите, остава имплицитна, както е ясно от контекста и здравия разум. Това прави разбирането на аргументите лесно за хората, но трудно за машините. Тази статия обобщава първата споделена задача за разбиране на аргументите. Предвид дадена предпоставка и твърдение заедно с тематична информация, целта е автоматично да се идентифицира правилната заповед сред двама кандидати, които са правдоподобни и лексически близки, но всъщност предполагат противоположни твърдения. Описваме набора от данни със 1970 инстанции, които изградихме за задачата, и очертаваме 21-те компютърни подхода, които участваха, повечето от които използваха невронни мрежи. Резултатите разкриват сложността на задачата, като много подходи трудно се подобряват над случайната точност от около 0,5. Все пак най-добрата наблюдавана точност (0,712) подчертава принципната осъществимост на идентифициране на гаранциите. Нашият анализ показва, че включването на външни знания е ключово за разбирането на разсъжденията.', 'hr': 'Prirodni jezički argument se sastoji od tvrdnje, kao i razloga koje se daju kao prostora za tvrdnju. Naredba koja objašnjava razum obično ostavlja implicitno, jer je jasno iz konteksta i zajedničkog smisla. To čini razumijevanje argumenata lakom za ljude, ali teško za strojeve. Ovaj papir sažetuje prvi zajednički zadatak o razumijevanju argumenata. S obzirom na premiju i tvrdnju zajedno s nekim temskim informacijama, cilj je bio automatski identificirati pravu nalog između dva kandidata koji su uvjerljivi i leksički bliski, ali zapravo znači suprotne tvrdnje. Opišemo kompletu podataka sa 1970. gadnim slučajevima koje smo izgradili za zadatak, i pokazujemo 21 računalnih pristupa koji su učestvovali, većina njih koristili neuralne mreže. Rezultati otkrivaju kompleksnost zadatka, s mnogim pristupima teško poboljšavanjem slučajne tačnosti oko 0,5. Ipak, najbolja opažena preciznost (0,712) podsjeća načelo mogućnost identifikacije naloga. Naša analiza ukazuje na to da je uključenje vanjskih znanja ključ razumljivanja razumijevanja.', 'da': 'Et argument om natursprog består af et krav samt begrundelser, der er anført som grundlag for kravet. Den kendelse, der forklarer ræsonnementet, efterlades normalt implicit, som det fremgår af sammenhængen og sund fornuft. Dette gør en forståelse af argumenter let for mennesker, men svær for maskiner. Denne artikel opsummerer den første fælles opgave om argument ræsonnement forståelse. Med en forudsætning og en påstand sammen med nogle emneoplysninger var målet automatisk at identificere den korrekte kendelse blandt to kandidater, der er plausible og leksiksk tætte, men faktisk indebærer modsatte påstande. Vi beskriver datasættet med 1970 forekomster, som vi byggede til opgaven, og vi skitserer de 21 beregningsmetoder, der deltog, hvoraf de fleste brugte neurale netværk. Resultaterne afslører opgavens kompleksitet, og mange tilgange forbedres næppe i forhold til den tilfældige nøjagtighed på omkring 0,5. Alligevel understreger den bedst observerede nøjagtighed (0,712) princippet om gennemførlighed af at identificere warrants. Vores analyse indikerer, at en inklusion af ekstern viden er nøglen til begrundelse forståelse.', 'nl': 'Een argument in de natuurlijke taal bestaat uit een claim en redenen die als uitgangspunt voor de claim worden gegeven. Het bevel om de redenering te verklaren wordt meestal impliciet gelaten, zoals blijkt uit de context en gezond verstand. Dit maakt het begrijpen van argumenten gemakkelijk voor mensen, maar moeilijk voor machines. Dit artikel vat de eerste gedeelde taak op het gebied van begrip van argumentredenering samen. Gezien een vooronderstelling en een claim samen met wat topic informatie, was het doel om automatisch de juiste warrant te identificeren tussen twee kandidaten die plausibel en lexicaal dichtbij zijn, maar in feite tegengestelde claims impliceren. We beschrijven de dataset met 1970-instances die we voor de taak hebben gebouwd, en we schetsen de 21-computationele benaderingen die deelnamen, waarvan de meeste neurale netwerken gebruikten. De resultaten onthullen de complexiteit van de taak, waarbij veel benaderingen nauwelijks verbeteren ten opzichte van de willekeurige nauwkeurigheid van ongeveer 0,5. Toch onderstreept de best waargenomen nauwkeurigheid (0.712) de principiële haalbaarheid van het identificeren van warrants. Onze analyse geeft aan dat het opnemen van externe kennis de sleutel is tot het begrijpen van redeneren.', 'id': 'Argumen bahasa alami terdiri dari klaim dan alasan yang diberikan sebagai tempat untuk klaim. Perintah menjelaskan alasan biasanya ditinggalkan implicit, karena jelas dari konteks dan kesehatan. Ini membuat pemahaman argumen mudah bagi manusia tapi sulit untuk mesin. Kertas ini mengungkapkan tugas pertama berbagi tentang pemahaman argumentasi. Mengingat sebuah pernyataan dan klaim bersama dengan beberapa informasi topik, tujuan adalah untuk secara otomatis mengidentifikasi surat perintah yang benar di antara dua kandidat yang dapat dipercaya dan secara lexik dekat, tetapi sebenarnya menunjukkan klaim yang berlawanan. Kami menggambarkan dataset dengan 1970 kejadian yang kami bina untuk tugas ini, dan kami menggambarkan 21 pendekatan komputasi yang berpartisipasi, yang sebagian besar menggunakan jaringan saraf. Hasilnya mengungkapkan kompleksitas tugas, dengan banyak pendekatan hampir tidak meningkat atas akurasi acak sekitar 0,5. Namun, akurasi terbaik yang diperhatikan (0,712) menyatakan prinsip feasibilitas untuk mengidentifikasi surat perintah. Our analysis indicates that an inclusion of external knowledge is key to reasoning comprehension.', 'fa': 'یک دلیل طبیعی زبان طبیعی از یک ادعا و دلیل\u200cهایی که به عنوان جایگاه\u200cهای ادعا داده می\u200cشود ساخته می\u200cشود. دستور توضيح دادن منطقي معمولاً غير قابل توجه باقي ميمونه، همونطور که از موضوع و حس معمولي روشن ميشه. این برای انسان آسان است، ولی برای ماشین سخت است. این کاغذ اولین وظیفه مشترک را در مورد توضیح دلیل درک می\u200cکند. با توجه به یک پیشنهاد و یک ادعا با بعضی اطلاعات موضوع، هدف این بود که به طور خودکار حکم درستی را در میان دو کاندیده\u200cها شناسایی کنیم که قابل توجه و به زبان نزدیک هستند، ولی در حقیقت معنی مخالف ادعا است. ما مجموعه داده\u200cها را با نمونه\u200cهای ۱۹۷۰ توصیف می\u200cکنیم که برای این کار ساخته\u200cایم، و ما ۲۱ دسترسی محاسباتی را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که شرکت می\u200cکنند، بیشتر از آن از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی استفاده می\u200cکردند. نتیجه\u200cها پیچیدگی کار را نشان می\u200cدهند، با بسیاری از دسترسی که به سختی بر دقیق تصادفی حدود 0.5 بهتر می\u200cشود. با این حال، بهترین دقیق مشاهده شده (0.712) قابلیت شناسایی قانون را تضمین می\u200cکند. تحلیل ما نشان می دهد که شامل دانش خارجی کلیدی برای منطقی درک است.', 'de': 'Ein Argument in natürlicher Sprache setzt sich aus einem Anspruch sowie aus Gründen zusammen, die als Voraussetzungen für den Anspruch angegeben werden. Der Haftbefehl, der die Begründung erklärt, wird in der Regel implizit gelassen, wie es aus dem Kontext und dem gesunden Menschenverstand klar ist. Das macht das Verständnis von Argumenten für Menschen leicht, aber für Maschinen schwierig. Diese Arbeit fasst die erste gemeinsame Aufgabe zum Verständnis von Argumentationsargumenten zusammen. Angesichts einer Prämisse und eines Anspruchs zusammen mit einigen Themeninformationen war das Ziel, automatisch den richtigen Warrant zwischen zwei Kandidaten zu identifizieren, die plausibel und lexikalisch nah sind, aber tatsächlich entgegengesetzte Ansprüche implizieren. Wir beschreiben den Datensatz mit 1970-Instanzen, die wir für diese Aufgabe erstellt haben, und wir skizzieren die 21-Rechenansätze, die beteiligt waren, von denen die meisten neuronale Netze verwendeten. Die Ergebnisse zeigen die Komplexität der Aufgabe, wobei sich viele Ansätze über die zufällige Genauigkeit von etwa 0,5 kaum verbessern. Dennoch unterstreicht die am besten beobachtete Genauigkeit (0.712) die prinzipielle Machbarkeit der Identifizierung von Warrants. Unsere Analyse zeigt, dass die Einbeziehung von externem Wissen der Schlüssel zum Verständnis von Argumenten ist.', 'ko': '자연 언어 논증은 하나의 주장과 주장의 전제로 제시된 이유로 구성된다.상하문과 상식을 보면 추리를 해석하는 이유는 통상적으로 함축적이다.이로 인해 논점을 이해하는 것은 인간에게는 쉬우나 기계적으로는 어렵다.본고는 논증 추리 이해에 관한 첫 번째 공유 임무를 총결하였다.하나의 전제와 하나의 성명, 그리고 일부 주제 정보를 정하는 것은 합리적이고 어휘가 비슷해 보이지만 실제로는 상반된 성명을 암시하는 두 후보 중에서 정확한 권한을 자동으로 식별하는 것이 목표이다.우리는 이 임무를 위해 구축된 1970개의 실례적인 데이터 집합을 묘사하고 참여한 21가지 계산 방법을 개괄하였으며, 그 중 대부분은 신경 네트워크를 사용하였다.그 결과 임무의 복잡성을 보여 주었고, 많은 방법들이 약 0.5의 무작위 정밀도를 거의 높일 수 없었다.712. 강조(712) 따르는 가장 좋은 원칙의 타당성을 확정한다.우리의 분석에 따르면 외부 지식을 포함하는 것이 추리 이해의 관건이다.', 'sw': 'Mjadala wa lugha ya asili umetengenezwa na madai pamoja na sababu zilizotolewa kama misingi ya madai hayo. Hatua hiyo ya kuelezea sababu kwa kawaida imeachwa kuwa na madhara, kwa sababu ni wazi kutokana na muktadha na maana ya kawaida. Hii inafanya mjadala rahisi kwa binadamu lakini ni vigumu kwa mashine. Gazeti hili linatoa muhtasari wa kazi ya kwanza iliyotumiwa kwenye mazungumzo yanayoelezea. Kutokana na madai pamoja na taarifa fulani za mada, lengo lilikuwa ni kuwatambua ruhusa sahihi miongoni mwa wagombea wawili ambao ni karibu na vibaya, lakini kwa hakika inamaanisha madai kinyume. Tunaelezea seti ya taarifa kwa matukio ya 1970 tuliyojenga kwa ajili ya kazi hiyo, na tunaelezea mbinu 21 za kompyuta zilizoshiriki, ambazo nyingi zilitumia mitandao ya uraia. Matokeo hayo yanaonyesha utata wa kazi, na hatua nyingi zinazozidi kuboresha kwa uhakika wa takribani 0.5. Bado, ukweli bora uliotangazwa (0.712) unaelezea umuhimu wa kutambua warrants. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kuwa pamoja na maarifa ya nje ni ufunguo wa kuelewa ufahamu.', 'sq': 'Një argument i gjuhës natyrore përbëhet nga një pretendim si dhe arsye të dhëna si bazë për pretendimin. Mandati që shpjegon arsyetimin zakonisht mbetet implicit, pasi është i qartë nga konteksti dhe kuptimi i përbashkët. Kjo e bën kuptimin e argumenteve të lehtë për njerëzit por të vështirë për makinat. Ky dokument përmbledh detyrën e parë të përbashkët mbi arsyetimin e arsyetimit. Duke pasur parasysh një premtim dhe një pretendim së bashku me disa informacione tematike, qëllimi ishte automatikisht të identifikohej mandati i saktë midis dy kandidatëve që janë të besueshëm dhe lexikisht të afërt, por në fakt nënkuptojnë pretendime të kundërta. Ne e përshkruajmë grupin e të dhënave me 1970 raste që ndërtuam për detyrën, dhe përshkruajmë 21 metoda llogaritare që morën pjesë, shumica e të cilave përdorën rrjetet neuronale. Rezultatet zbulojnë kompleksitetin e detyrës, me shumë qasje që vështirë përmirësohen lidhur me saktësinë e rastësisë rreth 0.5. Megjithatë, saktësia më e vëzhguar (0.712) thekson realizueshmërinë kryesore të identifikimit të mandateve. Analiza jonë tregon se përfshirja e njohurive të jashtme është kyç për arsyetimin e kuptimit.', 'tr': 'Tebiýal dil argümi iddia etmek üçin gerekli sebäpler ýaly. Garant sebäbini düşündirmek adatça netijeli bolýar, sebäbi kontekstden we orta duýgyndan açık bolýar. Bu insanlar için delilleri anlamanı kolay yapar fakat makineler için çok zor. Bu kagyz argumentyň düşünmesi üçin ilkinji paylaşyk zadyny sumlaýar. Bir hedef we bazy tema maglumaty bilen birlikte bir sowgat görä, maksady iki kandidyň arasynda ynamly we leksiýa ýakyn hakynda dogry soragyny otomatik bilen tanyşdyrmak bolandy, ýöne aslynda ters tersi sözleri bolmalydy. Biz bu zady üçin gurulduğumuz veri setini 1970-nji ýagdaýda tasvir edip görýäris we 21 sany kompýuter ýagdaýyny tassyklaýarys we olaryň köpüsi neural şebekeleri ulanýardy. Netijeler göreviniň karmaşıklygyny görkezýär, birnäçe ýagdaýynyň 0.5 ýagdaýynyň takyklygyny gowlaşdyrmak kyn ýagdaýynda. Yine de, iň gowy gözlenen dogrylygyny (0.712) garantlary tanymak üçin prinsipini aşdyrmak üçin bir süýtgeýär. Biziň analýusymyz daşarydaky bilim dahyl etmegiň düşünlemegiň açdygyny aýdýar.', 'af': "'n Natuurlike taal argument is gemaak van 'n aanvrag en ook redes gegee as premise vir die aanvrag. Die waarskuwing wat die redening verduidelik is, is gewoonlik inplisite verlaat, want dit is duidelik van die konteks en gemeenskaplike sens. Dit maak 'n verstanding van argumente maklik vir mense maar moeilik vir masjiene. Hierdie papier opsomming die eerste gedeelde taak op argument redering verstaan. Gien 'n premise en 'n aanvrag saam met sommige onderwerp inligting, was die doel om outomaties die korrekte wagwoord onder twee kandidate te identifiseer wat veroorsaaklik en leksies toe is, maar in werklikheid bedoel teenwoordige aanvraag. Ons beskryf die datastel met 1970-voorbeelde wat ons gebou het vir die taak, en ons oorskryf die 21 rekenaar toegang wat gedeeld het, die meeste van wat neurale netwerke gebruik het. Die resultate verduidelik die kompleksiteit van die taak, met baie toegange skaars verbetering oor die willekeurige presisie van omtrent 0.5. Nogtans, die beste aangesien waarskynlik (0. 712) onderstreep die prinsipel waarskynlik van identifiseer waarskynlike. Ons analisie wys dat 'n inklusie van eksterne kennis sleutel is om te redeer verstanding.", 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋ አጋጣሚ የጥያቄ ጉዳይ እና የተሰጠ ምክንያት ነው፡፡ ማስታወቂያውን በመቀበል የሚጠይቅ ማስረጃ በተለየ ነው፤ ከግንኙነቱ እና ከግንኙነቱ የተለየ ነው፡፡ ይህም ለሰዎች የሚቀላል ክርክሮችን ነገር ግን ለመመሳሪያዎች የሚያስቸግል ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የመጀመሪያውን የተካፈለውን ስራ በአካባቢው ውሳኔ ላይ ያሳያል፡፡ አካባቢ እና አንዳንድ አካባቢ መረጃ ጋር ጥያቄ በተደረገ ጊዜ ጉዳዩ በሁለቱ ተቃዋሚዎች መካከል የሚያስፈልገውን እውነተኛውን ፍርድ ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ ለስራው የሠርነውን የዳታ ሳጥን 1970 ምሳሌዎች እናሳውቃለን፤ እናም አብዛኞቻቸው የደዌብ መረብ የሚጠቀሙትን 21 አካባቢ ደረጃዎች እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቹ የስራውን ውጤት ግንኙነት ያሳያል፣ ብዙዎች የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ከ0.5 በላይ የሚያሳድጉት በጭንቅ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳ፣ የተጠቃሚ እርግጠት (0.712) የሚታወቀውን የውይይት ግንኙነት ማግኘት ነው፡፡ ትምህርታችን የውጭ እውቀት መግባት የውጭ እውቀት መግለጫ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի փաստարկը կազմված է փաստարկումից, ինչպես նաև պատճառներից, որոնք տրվում են որպես փաստարկության ենթադրություն: Պատճառը, որը բացատրում է մտածողությունը, սովորաբար անտեղյակ է թողնում, քանի որ այն պարզ է կոնտեքստից և առողջ իմաստից: Սա մարդկանց համար հեշտ է հասկանալ բանավեճերը, բայց մեքենաների համար դժվար է: This paper summarizes the first shared task on argument reasoning comprehension.  Հաշվի առնելով որոշ թեմային տեղեկատվություն և ենթադրությունը, նպատակն էր ինքնաբերաբար բացահայտել ճիշտ պատվիրանը երկու թեկնածուների միջև, որոնք հավատալի են և լեքսիկապես մոտ են, բայց իրականում նշանակում են հակառակ հայտարարություններ: Մենք նկարագրում ենք 1970 թվականի տվյալների համակարգը, որոնք մենք կառուցել ենք այս խնդրի համար, և մենք նկարագրում ենք 21 հաշվարկների մոտեցումները, որոնց մեծ մասը օգտագործում էր նեյրոնային ցանցեր: Արդյունքները բացահայտում են խնդրի բարդությունը, որովհետև շատ մոտեցումներ հազիվ են բարելավվում մոտ 0.5 պատահական ճշմարտության հարցում: Այնուամենայնիվ, ամենալավ դիտարկված ճշգրտությունը (0.712) ենթադրում է պատվիրանքների հայտնաբերման սկզբունքը: Մեր վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ արտաքին գիտելիքների ներառումը կարևոր է հասկանալու մտածելու համար:', 'bn': 'একটি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় যুক্তি তৈরি করা হয়েছে দাবীর জন্য দাবীর কারণেও। কারণ ব্যাখ্যা করার ওয়ারেন্ট সাধারণত বাকি যায়, কারণ এটা প্রেক্ষাপট এবং সাধারণ মান থেকে পরিষ্কার। এটা মানুষের জন্য যুক্তি সহজ করে কিন্তু মেশিনের জন্য কঠিন। এই পত্রিকাটি প্রথম শেয়ার করা কাজের সারসংক্ষিপ্ত করেছে যুক্তির ব্যাপারে যুক্তি প্রদান করা হয়েছ কিছু বিষয়ের সাথে একটি প্রেসিডেন্ট এবং কিছু তথ্যের দাবি প্রদান করেছে, লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে দুই প্রার্থীর মধ্যে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সঠিক ওয়ারেন্ট চিহ্নিত কর আমরা ১৯৭০ সালের দ্বারা ডাটাসেট বর্ণনা করি যা কাজের জন্য নির্মাণ করেছিলাম এবং আমরা অংশগ্রহণ করেছিলাম ২১ টি গণনাত্রিক উপায়ের বিষয়টি  ফলাফল এই কাজের জটিলতা প্রকাশ করে, যেখানে অনেক ক্ষেত্রে প্রায় ০. তবুও সেরা পর্যবেক্ষিত সঠিকভাবে (০. ৭১২) ওয়ারেন্ট চিহ্নিত নীতির বৈধতার নীতিকে উল্লেখ করেছে। আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ নির্দেশ করছে যে বাইরের জ্ঞানের মধ্যে যোগ দেয়া হচ্ছে বিভিন্ন বিষয়ের কারণে।', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil argumenti iddiasından, həmçinin iddiasına bənzər səbəbləri olaraq yaradılır. Düşünüşünü açıq edən warrant genellikle imkansız buraxır, çünki bu səviyyədən və ortaq anlamdan açıq. Bu, insanlar üçün dəlillərin anlaşılmasını asanlaşdırır, lakin makinelər üçün a ğır. Bu kağıt argumentin anlaşılması haqqında ilk paylaşılan işləri təmizləyir. Bazı məsələlər məlumatı ilə birlikdə bir təsiri və təsiri ilə birlikdə, məqsəd iki kandidātu arasındakı doğru warrant ı avtomatik təşkil etmək idi, lakin əslində müxtəlif təsirlərini təşkil etmək idi. Biz bu iş üçün inşa etdiyimiz verilənlər qurulduğumuz məlumatları 1970 nəfərlə təsdiqləyirik, və onların çoxu nöral ağlarını istifadə edirdik. Sonuçlar işin sarmaqlığını göstərər, bir çox yaxınlıqları 0,5 ilə rastgele ədaləti üstündə daha yaxşılaşdırmaq zorunda idi. Halbuki, ən yaxşı gözlənən doğruluğu (0,712) əmrlərini tanıma qabiliyyətini dəyişdirir. Bizim analizimiz açıq bilginin dahil edilməsi anlaşılması üçün anahtar olduğunu göstərir.', 'cs': 'Argument přirozeného jazyka se skládá z tvrzení a důvodů uvedených jako předpoklad pro tvrzení. Rozkaz vysvětlující odůvodnění je obvykle ponechán implicitní, jak je jasné z kontextu a zdravého rozumu. To činí porozumění argumentům snadné pro člověka, ale těžké pro stroje. Tento článek shrnuje první sdílený úkol o porozumění argumentům. Vzhledem k předpokladu a nároku spolu s některými tématickými informacemi bylo cílem automaticky identifikovat správný příkaz mezi dvěma kandidáty, které jsou věrohodné a lexicky blízké, ale ve skutečnosti naznačují opačné tvrzení. Popisujeme datovou sadu s instancemi 70er let, které jsme pro tento úkol vytvořili, a nastíníme 21 výpočetní přístupy, které se zúčastnily, z nichž většina využívala neuronové sítě. Výsledky ukazují složitost úkolu, přičemž mnoho přístupů se těžko zlepšuje nad náhodnou přesností asi 0,5. Přesto nejlepší pozorovaná přesnost (0.712) zdůrazňuje zásadní proveditelnost identifikace opcí. Naše analýza ukazuje, že zahrnutí vnějších znalostí je klíčem k porozumění uvažování.', 'bs': 'Prirodni jezički argument se sastoji od tvrdnje, kao i razloga koje se daju kao prostora za tvrdnju. Naredba koja objašnjava razum obično ostavlja implicitno, jer je jasno iz konteksta i zajedničkog smisla. To čini razumijevanje argumenata lakom za ljude, ali teško za mašine. Ovaj papir sažetuje prvi zajednički zadatak o razumijevanju argumentacija. S obzirom na premiju i tvrdnju zajedno sa nekim temskim informacijama, cilj je bio automatski identificirati pravu nalog između dva kandidata koji su uvjerljivi i leksički bliski, ali zapravo znači suprotne tvrdnje. Opišemo kompletu podataka sa 1970 instancijama koje smo izgradili za taj zadatak, i objašnjavamo 21 računalnih pristupa koji su učestvovali, većina kojih su koristili neuralne mreže. Rezultati otkrivaju kompleksnost zadatka, s mnogim pristupima jedva da se poboljšava nad nasumičnom preciznošću oko 0,5. Ipak, najbolja opažena preciznost (0,712) naglašava mogućnost principa identifikacije naloga. Naša analiza ukazuje na to da je uključenje vanjskih znanja ključ razumljivanja razumijevanja.', 'ca': "Un argument de llenguatge natural està compost d'una reclamació i de raons dadas com premis per la reclamació. The warrant explaining the reasoning is usually left implicit, as it is clear from the context and common sense.  Això fa que la comprensió dels arguments sigui fàcil per als humans però difícil per a les màquines. Aquest paper resume la primera tasca compartida sobre la comprensió del raonament dels arguments. Tenint en compte una premisa i una reclamació juntament amb alguna informació temàtica, l'objectiu va ser identificar automàticament la orden correct a entre dos candidats que són plausibles i llexicament propers, però de fet impliquen reclamacions oposes. Descrivem el conjunt de dades amb 1970 instances que vam construir per la tasca, i esboquem els 21 enfocaments computacionals que van participar, la majoria d'elles utilitzant xarxes neurals. Els resultats revelen la complexitat de la tasca, amb molts enfocaments gairebé millorant amb la precisió aleatòria d'uns 0,5. Still, the best observed accuracy (0.712) underlines the principle feasibility of identifying warrants.  La nostra an àlisi indica que una inclusió del coneixement extern és clau per a raonar la comprensió.", 'et': 'Loodusliku keele argument koosneb väidetest ja põhjendustest, mis on esitatud nõude eeldustena. Põhjendusi selgitav määrus jäetakse tavaliselt kaudseks, nagu see on selge kontekstist ja tervest mõistusest. See muudab argumentide mõistmise inimestele lihtsaks, kuid masinatele raskeks. Käesolev raamat võtab kokku esimese jagatud ülesande argumentide arusaama. Arvestades eeldust ja väidet koos mõne teemainfo, oli eesmärk automaatselt tuvastada õige order kahe kandidaadi seas, mis on usutav ja leksikaalselt lähedane, kuid tegelikult viitavad vastupidistele väitetele. Kirjeldame andmekogumit 1970 eksemplaridega, mille me selle ülesande jaoks ehitasime, ja kirjeldame 21 arvutuslikku lähenemisviisi, millest enamik kasutas neurovõrke. Tulemused näitavad ülesande keerukust, paljud lähenemisviisid peaaegu paranevad juhusliku täpsusega umbes 0,5. Siiski rõhutab parim täheldatud täpsus (0,712) garantiiõiguste kindlakstegemise põhimõtet teostatavust. Meie analüüs näitab, et väliste teadmiste kaasamine on arutluse mõistmise võti.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkielenen argumentti koostuu väitteestä sekä väitteen perusteluista. Perustelun selitys jätetään yleensä implisiittiseksi, kuten kontekstista ja terveestä järjestä käy ilmi. Tämä tekee argumenttien ymmärtämisestä helppoa ihmisille, mutta vaikeaa koneille. Tässä artikkelissa tiivistetään ensimmäinen yhteinen tehtävä argumenttien päättelyn ymmärtämisestä. Kun otetaan huomioon lähtökohta ja väite sekä joitakin aihetietoja, tavoitteena oli automaattisesti tunnistaa oikea etsintälupa kahdesta ehdokkaasta, jotka ovat uskottavia ja sanastollisesti lähellä, mutta itse asiassa viittaavat vastakkaisiin väitteisiin. Kuvaamme aineistoa 1970 esimerkkinä, jotka rakensimme tehtävään, ja hahmottelemme 21 laskennallista lähestymistapaa, joista suurin osa käytti neuroverkkoja. Tulokset paljastavat tehtävän monimutkaisuuden, ja monet lähestymistavat tuskin paranevat noin 0,5:n satunnaistarkkuudella. Paras havaittu tarkkuus (0,712) korostaa kuitenkin optioiden tunnistamisen periaatetta. Analyysimme osoittaa, että ulkoisen tiedon sisällyttäminen on avain päättelyn ymmärtämiseen.', 'jv': 'Perusahaan anyar luwih dumadhi nganggo perusahaan dumadhi iki dadi apik dadi, dadi apik perusahaan kanggo dianggap Warraning ing ing pansinipun dipunangé perusahaan kelapa nang titipun ingkang dipunangé, kaya saé nang kontèkèké lan sanes barang. Punika awak dhéwé luwih akeh spirampun gampang kanggo wong liyane karo perangkat apakno. name Ngomongke tresno lan ungano informasi sing paling-tema, bukno iki dadi perusahaan iso nggawe nguasai perusahaan langkung durung malah sing apik dhéwé, lho iso nguasai perusahaan langkung saé katêpakan. Awak dhéwé pisan dataset karo ngono 2007 instans sing dibenalke nggawe nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe gerakan, lan ujaran nglebok sistem sing berarti sabên Manual Rejaling Mungkin, akeh sing paling nêmên ngerasakno dadi (0.7) Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo nyelaraké ngerasakno ning ngerasakno', 'sk': 'Argument naravnega jezika je sestavljen iz trditve in razlogov, navedenih kot predlog za trditev. Nalog, ki pojasnjuje obrazložitev, je običajno impliciten, kot je jasno iz konteksta in zdravega razuma. To omogoča lažje razumevanje argumentov za ljudi, težko pa za stroje. Ta prispevek povzema prvo skupno nalogo o razumevanju argumentov. Glede na predpostavko in trditev skupaj z nekaterimi tematskimi informacijami je bil cilj avtomatično identificirati pravilen nalog med dvema kandidatoma, ki sta verjetna in leksično blizu, vendar dejansko nakazujeta nasprotne trditve. Podatkovni nabor opisujemo s 1970 primeri, ki smo jih zgradili za nalogo, in opišemo 21 računalniških pristopov, ki so sodelovali, od katerih je večina uporabljala nevronska omrežja. Rezultati kažejo kompleksnost naloge, pri čemer se mnogi pristopi komaj izboljšajo nad naključno natančnostjo približno 0,5. Kljub temu najboljša opažena natančnost (0,712) poudarja načelo izvedljivosti opredelitve nalog. Naša analiza kaže, da je vključitev zunanjega znanja ključnega pomena za razumevanje razmišljanja.', 'ha': "An sami rabon harshe na natura daga wani daidai da kuma misãlai wanda aka bai wa daidai. The warrant explaining the reasoning is usually left implicit, as it is clear from the context and common sense.  Wannan yana mai sauƙi ga mutane kuma amma mai tsanani ga mashine. Wannan takardar na ƙari aikin da aka raba shi farkon da aka raba shi a kan runnin mazaɓa. Gida wani dalilin da aka sami wani maɓalli da wani maɓalli, aimakin ya kasance ana gane wa farat-ɗabi'a wa'urar da gaske daga ma'abũcin biyu waɗanda ke karya da ɓarna da kuma aka rufe marufukiya, kuma amma yana ƙara madaidaita guda. Munã bayyana zaɓallin data da misãlai 1970 waɗanda muka gina wa aikin, kuma mu ƙarfafa zaɓen hanyõyin 21 na lissafi wanda suka yi shirin ta, masu yawansu sun yi amfani da mitandao na neura. Mataimakin za'a nuna masu hushi wa aikin, da wasu hanyoyi mãsu yawa, bã za'a bada improve wa tabbatarwa na daidai 0.5. Haƙĩƙa, mafi kyaun tsari da aka tsare (0.712) na ƙari rubutu'in da za'a iya gane masu tsarin. Ana'yinMu yana bayan cẽwa, an shigar da wani ilmi na baka yana da maɓallici ga fahimta.", 'he': 'טיעון שפה טבעי מורכב מהטענה וגם סיבות שנתנו בתור מקומות לטעון. הצו שמסביר את הסיבה בדרך כלל נשאר מרושע, כפי שזה ברור מהקשר וההגיון הנפשי. זה הופך להבנה של ויכוחים קלים עבור בני אדם אבל קשה עבור מכונות. העיתון הזה מסכם את המשימה הראשונה המשותפת על ההבנה הגיונית לטיעון. Given a premise and a claim along with some topic information, the goal was to automatically identify the correct warrant among two candidates that are plausible and lexically close, but in fact imply opposite claims.  We describe the dataset with 1970 instances that we built for the task, and we outline the 21 computational approaches that participated, most of which used neural networks.  התוצאות חושפות את מורכבות המשימה, עם גישות רבות בקושי משתפרות על מדויקת אקראית של כ-0.5. למרות זאת, מדויקת התבוננות הטובה ביותר (0.712) מתייחסת לאפשרות העיקרית לזהות צווים. הניתוח שלנו מצביע שכלול ידע חיצוני הוא מפתח להבינה הגיונית.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་argument་ཞིག་ནི་ཕན་རྐྱེན་ཞིག་དང་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། The warrant explaining the reasoning is usually left implicit, as it is clear from the context and common sense. འདིས་མི་དང་སླ་ངང་ཆེ་བའི་སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་ལ་རྟོགས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། This paper summarizes the first shared task on argument reasoning comprehension. དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚོ་ཁག་དང་བཤད་པ་གཅིག་གི་བརྗོད་དོན་དག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་པའི་ཆོག་རྐྱེན་གཉིས་ནང་དུ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛིན ང་ཚོས་༡༩༧༠་པའི་དུས་ལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱས་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ནང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གནད་སྡུད་བྱ་ཚིག་དཀའ་ངལ་གཅིག་མཐོང་བ་ཡིན། གནད་སྡུད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་དཔལ་རྩིས་0.5ལས་མཐོང་སྐྱེས་ཚད་དཀའ་ Still, the best observed accuracy (0.712) underlines the principle feasibility of identifying warrants. ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཕྱི་རིག་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ནང་དོན་ཡོད་པ་དེ་རྟོགས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་།'}
{'en': 'GIST at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : A network transferring inference knowledge to Argument Reasoning Comprehension task', 'ar': 'GIST في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: شبكة تنقل المعرفة الاستدلالية إلى مهمة فهم استدلال الحجج', 'es': 'GIST en SemEval-2018 Tarea 12: Una red que transfiere el conocimiento de inferencia a la tarea de Comprensión de Razonamiento Argumentario', 'fr': "GIST au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 12\xa0: Un réseau transférant les connaissances d'inférence à la tâche de compréhension du raisonnement d'argument", 'pt': 'GIST no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: Uma rede transferindo conhecimento de inferência para a tarefa de Compreensão de Raciocínio de Argumentos', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018дє‹12GIST:з§»дєЋзЅ‘з»њ', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク12の要点：推論知識を引数推論理解タスクに転送するネットワーク', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 12 पर GIST: तर्क तर्क समझ कार्य के लिए अनुमान ज्ञान स्थानांतरित करने वाला एक नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'GIST на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Сеть, передающая знания о выводах в задачу «Понимание аргументации»', 'ga': 'GIST ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: Líonra a aistríonn eolas tátail go tasc Tuiscint ar Réasúnaíocht Argóint', 'ka': 'GIST SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 12: ქსელი, რომელიც ინფრენციის მეცნიერებას აპგუმენტის მიზეზების კომპრენციო პარამეტრის გადატანაცია', 'el': 'Εργασία 12: Ένα δίκτυο που μεταφέρει γνώση συμπερασμάτων σε εργασία κατανόησης επιχειρημάτων', 'hu': 'GIST a SemEval-2018 12. feladat: A következtetési ismereteket átvivő hálózat az Argument Reaching Comprehension feladatba', 'it': "GIST a SemEval-2018 Task 12: Una rete che trasferisce la conoscenza dell'inferenza all'attività di comprensione dell'argomento", 'lt': '12 užduotis: tinklas, perduodantis išvadų žinias argumentų pagrindimo supratimo užduotims', 'kk': 'GIST 12- тапсырмасының semiEval- 2018 тапсырмасы: Аргументтің түсініктемесін түсініктеме тапсырмасына желі', 'ms': 'GIST pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Rangkaian yang memindahkan pengetahuan kesimpulan ke tugas Pemahaman Argumen', 'mk': 'ГИСТ на SemEval-2018 задача 12: мрежа која пренесува инференциско знаење на задачата за размислување на аргументите', 'mn': 'GIST at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A network transferring inference knowledge to Argument Reasoning Comprehension task', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ ജിസ്റ്റ്: ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് വായിക്കുന്നതിലേക്ക് പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരണ ജോലി', 'ro': 'GIST la SemEval-2018 Task 12: O rețea care transferă cunoștințe de inferență la sarcina de înțelegere a argumentelor', 'no': 'GIST på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 12: Eit nettverk som overfører inferensningskunnskap til argument Reasoning Comprehension task', 'sr': 'GIST na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: mreža koja prebacuje znanje infekcije na zadatak za kompresiju', 'pl': 'GIST w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Sieć przenosząca wiedzę o wnioskach do zadania Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'mt': 'GIST f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 12: Netwerk li jittrasferixxi l-għarfien ta’ inferenza għal kompitu ta’ Komprensjoni li Jaġġustifika Argument', 'si': 'GIST at semeval-2018 Job 12: A network transmitting Infrence Knowience to argment Reasoning Compression job', 'so': 'GIST at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A network transferring inference knowledge to Argument Reasoning Comprehension task', 'ur': 'GIST at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A network transferring inference knowledge to Argument Reasoning Comprehension task', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் GIST 12: ஒரு பிணையத்திற்கு நோய் அறிவை மாற்றும் பிணையத்திற்கு முடிவு செய்யும் செயல்', 'sv': 'GIST på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: Ett nätverk som överför slutsatskunskap till Argument Reasoning Comprehension uppgift', 'uz': 'SemEval-2018 Vazifani 12: Argument Reading Completion Vazifalar', 'vi': 'GIST ở SemEvl-208 Task 12: Một mạng vận chuyển kiến thức nhận biết đến công việc quy trình biện hộ lý luận.', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Мрежа, прехвърляща знания за изводи към задача за разбиране на аргументите', 'da': 'GIST på SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Et netværk, der overfører viden om inference til Argument Reasoning Comprehension opgave', 'nl': 'GIST bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Een netwerk dat inferentiekennis overbrengt naar Argument Reasoning Comprehension taak', 'hr': 'GIST na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: mreža koja prenosi znanje infekcije na zadatak za komprehenziju argumentima', 'id': 'GIST di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Sebuah jaringan yang memindahkan pengetahuan inferensi ke tugas Argumen Memalaskan Pemahaman', 'fa': 'GIST در ماموریت ۱۲۰۸: یک شبکه در حال انتقال دانش آلودگی به وظیفه آلودگی دلایل تعقیب', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 퀘스트 12의 요점: 추리 지식을 논증 추리 이해 퀘스트로 바꾸는 네트워크', 'sw': 'GIST kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Mtandao unaohamisha maarifa ya kutokuwepo kwa maambukizi yanayotokana na umuhimu', 'tr': 'GIST at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A network transferring inference knowledge to Argument Reasoning Comprehension task', 'af': "GIST by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 12: ' n netwerk oordrag inferensie kennis na Argument Reasoning Comprehension taak", 'sq': 'GIST në SemEval-2018 Task 12: Një rrjet që transferon njohuritë e përfundimit në Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'hy': 'ԳԻՍՏ-ը 2018-ի կիսագնդի 12. առաջադրանքում. ցանց է, որը տեղափոխում է հետևանքների գիտելիքները բանավեճի ընկալումների առաջադրանքին', 'am': 'ስራ 12', 'az': 'GIST at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A network transferring inference knowledge to Argument Reasoning Comprehension task', 'de': 'GIST at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Ein Netzwerk, das Inferenz-Wissen auf Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task überträgt', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১২: আর্গুমেন্টের পাঠানোর জন্য একটি নেটওয়ার্ক সংক্রান্ত জ্ঞান পরিবর্তন করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': "GIST a SemEval-2018 tasca 12: Una xarxa que transfereix coneixements de inferència a la tasca de comprensió d'arguments", 'bs': 'GIST na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: mreža koja prenosi znanje infekcije na zadatak za kompresiju argumentacija', 'et': 'GIST SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 12: Võrgustik, mis edastab järelduste teadmised argumentide põhjendamise ülesandele', 'cs': 'GIST na SemEval-2018 Úkol 12: Síť přenášející znalosti inference na úlohu Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'fi': 'GIST SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: Verkosto siirtää päättelytietoa argumentin järkeilyn ymmärtämiseen tehtävään', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'GIST ב SemEval-2018 משימה 12: רשת מעבירה את ידע ההנחה למשימת ההבנה', 'sk': 'GIST na SemEval-2018 Naloga 12: Mreža, ki prenaša znanje o sklepih v nalogo razumevanja argumentov', 'jv': 'GIRT nang seminval-2008 task 12', 'bo': 'GIST at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A network transferring inference knowledge to Argument Reasoning Comprehension task'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our GIST team system that participated in SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension task (Task 12). Here, we address two challenging factors : unstated common senses and two lexically close warrants that lead to contradicting claims. A key idea for our system is full use of transfer learning from the Natural Language Inference (NLI) task to this task. We used Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) to learn the NLI dataset. We describe how to use ESIM for transfer learning to choose correct warrant through a proposed system. We show comparable results through ablation experiments. Our system ranked 1st among 22 systems, outperforming all the systems more than 10 %.', 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro sistema de equipos GIST que participó en la tarea de Comprensión de Razonamiento Argumentario SemEval-2018 (Tarea 12). Aquí, abordamos dos factores desafiantes: sentidos comunes no declarados y dos órdenes léxicamente cercanas que conducen a afirmaciones contradictorias. Una idea clave para nuestro sistema es el uso completo de la transferencia del aprendizaje de la tarea de Inferencia del Lenguaje Natural (NLI) a esta tarea. Utilizamos el Modelo de Inferencia Secuencial Mejorado (ESIM) para aprender el conjunto de datos NLI. Describimos cómo usar ESIM para transferir el aprendizaje para elegir la garantía correcta a través de un sistema propuesto. Mostramos resultados comparables a través de experimentos de ablación. Nuestro sistema ocupó el primer lugar entre 22 sistemas, superando a todos los sistemas en más de un 10%.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام فريق GIST الذي شارك في مهمة SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning فهم (المهمة 12). هنا ، نتناول عاملين تحديين: الحواس الشائعة غير المعلنة واثنين من الضمانات المتقاربة من الناحية اللغوية التي تؤدي إلى تناقض الادعاءات. تتمثل الفكرة الأساسية لنظامنا في الاستخدام الكامل لعملية نقل التعلم من مهمة استدلال اللغة الطبيعية (NLI) إلى هذه المهمة. استخدمنا نموذج الاستدلال المتسلسل المحسن (ESIM) لتعلم مجموعة بيانات NLI. نحن نصف كيفية استخدام ESIM لنقل التعلم لاختيار أمر صحيح من خلال نظام مقترح. نظهر نتائج قابلة للمقارنة من خلال تجارب الاجتثاث. احتل نظامنا المرتبة الأولى بين 22 نظامًا ، متفوقًا على جميع الأنظمة بأكثر من 10٪.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système d'équipe GIST qui a participé à la tâche de compréhension du raisonnement des arguments SEMEVAL-2018 (tâche 12). Nous abordons ici deux facteurs difficiles\xa0: le bon sens non déclaré et deux bons de souscription lexicaux qui mènent à des affirmations contradictoires. Une idée clé de notre système est l'utilisation complète de l'apprentissage par transfert depuis la tâche d'inférence en langage naturel (NLI) vers cette tâche. Nous avons utilisé le modèle d'inférence séquentielle amélioré (ESIM) pour apprendre le jeu de données NLI. Nous décrivons comment utiliser ESIM pour l'apprentissage par transfert afin de choisir le bon mandat grâce à un système proposé. Nous montrons des résultats comparables grâce à des expériences d'ablation. Notre système s'est classé 1er parmi 22 systèmes, surpassant tous les systèmes de plus de 10\xa0%.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema de equipe GIST que participou da tarefa SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension (Tarefa 12). Aqui, abordamos dois fatores desafiadores: senso comum não declarado e duas garantias lexicalmente próximas que levam a afirmações contraditórias. Uma ideia chave para o nosso sistema é o uso completo da transferência de aprendizagem da tarefa de Inferência de Linguagem Natural (NLI) para esta tarefa. Usamos o Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) para aprender o conjunto de dados NLI. Descrevemos como usar o ESIM para transferência de aprendizado para escolher a garantia correta por meio de um sistema proposto. Mostramos resultados comparáveis por meio de experimentos de ablação. Nosso sistema ficou em 1º lugar entre 22 sistemas, superando todos os sistemas em mais de 10%.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018の論点推論理解タスク（タスク12 ）に参加したGISTチームシステムについて説明する。ここで、私たちは2つの挑戦的な要因に取り組んでいます。未述べの常識と、矛盾する主張につながる2つの語彙的に近いワラントです。私たちのシステムの重要なアイデアは、自然言語推論（ NLI ）タスクからこのタスクへの転送学習を完全に利用することです。NLIデータセットを学習するために、拡張シーケンシャルインジェクションモデル（ ESIM ）を使用しました。私たちは、ESIMを転送学習に使用して、提案されたシステムを通じて正しい令状を選択する方法について説明します。焼灼実験を通じて同等の結果を示した。当社のシステムは22のシステムの中で1位であり、すべてのシステムを10%以上上回っていました。', 'zh': '本文引臣等参SemEval-2018论理解任务(任12)之GIST团队统。 此二挑战性者,未说明之常与两隙之词汇近权证也。 吾道者,所以尽自然语言理(NLI)而迁学也。 吾以增强型次推理模型 (ESIM) 以学 NLI 数集。 臣等述所以迁ESIM学,以建言择正权证。 以消融实验见出可较也。 系统第一22,性过诸统10%。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हमारे जीआईएसटी टीम सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जिसने SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension task (Task 12) में भाग लिया था। यहां, हम दो चुनौतीपूर्ण कारकों को संबोधित करते हैं: अनकहा सामान्य ज्ञान और दो लेक्सिकल रूप से बंद वारंट जो विरोधाभासी दावों का कारण बनते हैं। हमारे सिस्टम के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण विचार इस कार्य के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान (एनएलआई) कार्य से सीखने के हस्तांतरण का पूर्ण उपयोग है। हमने एनएलआई डेटासेट सीखने के लिए एन्हांस्ड अनुक्रमिक अनुमान मॉडल (ईएसआईएम) का उपयोग किया। हम वर्णन करते हैं कि एक प्रस्तावित प्रणाली के माध्यम से सही वारंट चुनने के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखने के लिए ईएसआईएम का उपयोग कैसे करें। हम एब्लेशन प्रयोगों के माध्यम से तुलनीय परिणाम दिखाते हैं। हमारा सिस्टम 22 प्रणालियों के बीच 1 वें स्थान पर है, जो सभी प्रणालियों को 10% से अधिक बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система команд GIST, которая участвовала в задаче «Понимание аргументации SemEval-2018» (Задача 12). Здесь мы обращаемся к двум сложным факторам: неуказанным общим смыслам и двум лексически близким ордерам, которые приводят к противоречивым утверждениям. Ключевой идеей для нашей системы является полное использование обучения переносу с задачи вывода естественного языка (NLI) на эту задачу. Мы использовали расширенную модель последовательного вывода (ESIM) для изучения набора данных NLI. Мы описываем, как использовать ESIM для обучения трансферу, чтобы выбрать правильный ордер через предлагаемую систему. Мы показываем сопоставимые результаты с помощью экспериментов по абляции. Наша система заняла первое место среди 22 систем, опередив все системы более чем на 10%.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras foirne GIST a ghlac páirt i dtasc Tuiscint Réasúnachta Argóint SemEval-2018 (Tasc 12). Anseo, tugaimid aghaidh ar dhá thoisc dhúshlánacha: céadfaí comónta neamhráite agus dhá bharántas gar-foclóra as a dtagann éilimh chontrártha. Príomh-smaoineamh dár gcóras is ea lánúsáid a bhaint as an bhfoghlaim aistrithe ón tasc Tátal Teanga Nádúrtha (NLI) chuig an tasc seo. D’úsáideamar Múnla Tátail Sheicheamhaí Feabhsaithe (ESIM) chun tacar sonraí LNÉ a fhoghlaim. Déanaimid cur síos ar conas ESIM a úsáid le foghlaim aistrithe chun barántas ceart a roghnú trí chóras molta. Léirímid torthaí inchomparáide trí thurgnaimh ablation. Bhí ár gcóras sa 1ú háit i measc 22 córas, ag déanamh níos fearr ná na córais ar fad níos mó ná 10%.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ჩვენი GIST ჯგუფის სისტემის აღწერა, რომელიც SemEval-2018 აპგუმენტის მიზეზის კომპრეცენციის რაოდენობაში (რაოდენობა 12). აქ, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ორი შესაძლებელი ფაქტორები: არაწერებული საერთო სენსი და ორი ლექსიკურად დახურებული დასრულებული დასრულებები, რომლებიც შეგვიძლია გადაწყვე ჩვენი სისტემისთვის გასაკუთარი იდეა, რომელიც ჩვენი სისტემისთვის უფრო გამოიყენება ნაირთვის ენერგიის ინფერენციის (NLI) დავალების ამ დავალებისთვის. ჩვენ NLI მონაცემების კონფირეციის მოდელი (ESIM) გავისწავლათ. ჩვენ აღწერეთ როგორ ESIM გამოყენება სწავლებისთვის გადასწავლებისთვის, როგორ გამოყენება მარტივი დასწავლების შესაძლებლობა, როგორ გამ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ შემდგომარებელი წარმოდგენები აბლექციის ექსპერიმენტებით. ჩვენი სისტემა 22 სისტემაში ერთი წერტილი იყო, რომ ყველა სისტემას უფრო მეტი 10%.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα ομάδας που συμμετείχε στην εργασία Κατανόησης επιχειρημάτων (Εργασία 12). Εδώ, αντιμετωπίζουμε δύο προκλητικούς παράγοντες: μη διατυπωμένες κοινές αισθήσεις και δύο λεξικά στενά εντάλματα που οδηγούν σε αντιφατικές αξιώσεις. Μια βασική ιδέα για το σύστημά μας είναι η πλήρης χρήση της μάθησης μεταφοράς από την εργασία Συμπερασμάτων Φυσικής Γλώσσας (ΝΛΙ) σε αυτή την εργασία. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε το βελτιωμένο διαδοχικό μοντέλο συμπερασμάτων (ESIM) για να μάθουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων NLI. Περιγράφουμε τον τρόπο χρήσης του για την εκμάθηση μεταφοράς για την επιλογή σωστού εντάλματος μέσω ενός προτεινόμενου συστήματος. Δείχνουμε συγκρίσιμα αποτελέσματα μέσω πειραμάτων αφαίρεσης. Το σύστημά μας κατατάχθηκε πρώτο μεταξύ 22 συστημάτων, ξεπερνώντας όλα τα συστήματα περισσότερο από 10%.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 Argument Reasuring Comprehension feladatban (12. feladat) részt vevő GIST csoportrendszerünket. Itt két kihívást jelentő tényezővel foglalkozunk: a nem állított közös érzékekkel és két lexikailag szoros indokkal, amelyek ellentmondó állításokhoz vezetnek. Rendszerünk kulcsfontosságú elképzelése a Natural Language Inference (NLI) feladat teljes körű kihasználása. Az Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) segítségével tanulhatjuk meg az NLI adatkészletet. Leírjuk, hogyan használható az ESIM transzfertanulás céljából a megfelelő parancs kiválasztásához egy javasolt rendszeren keresztül. Hasonló eredményeket mutatunk ablációs kísérletekkel. Rendszerünk a 22 rendszer közül az első helyen állt, több mint 10%-os teljesítménnyel felülmúlva az összes rendszert.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema di team GIST che ha partecipato al compito SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension (Task 12). Qui affrontiamo due fattori sfidanti: sensi comuni non dichiarati e due mandati lessicamente vicini che portano a affermazioni contraddittorie. Un'idea chiave per il nostro sistema è il pieno utilizzo dell'apprendimento di trasferimento dal compito Natural Language Inference (NLI) a questo compito. Abbiamo usato Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) per imparare il set di dati NLI. Descriviamo come utilizzare ESIM per l'apprendimento del trasferimento per scegliere il giusto mandato attraverso un sistema proposto. Mostriamo risultati comparabili attraverso esperimenti di ablazione. Il nostro sistema si è classificato primo tra i 22 sistemi, superando tutti i sistemi di oltre il 10%.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің GIST топтардың жүйесімізді біртінші-2018 Аргументтердің түсініктемесін шешу тапсырмасына қатынайды (12 тапсырма). Мұнда екі әсер ететін факторды адрес береміз: жалпы сезімдер мен екі лексикалық жабу арқылы жабу арқылы қарсы жауап береді. Жүйеміздің кілт идеясы - natural Language Inference (NLI) тапсырмасынан осы тапсырмаға аудару үйренімізді толық қолдану. Біз NLI деректер жиынын оқыту үшін келесі қадамдастыру үлгісін (ESIM) қолдандық. Біз ESIM бағдарламасын таңдау үшін оқыту үшін жүйесі арқылы дұрыс бағдарламасын таңдау үшін қалай пайдалануын анықтаймыз. Біз жұмыс істеу тәжірибелерімен салыстыратын нәтижелерді көрсетедік. Біздің жүйеміз 22 жүйелерден 1- ші ретінде, барлық жүйелерді 10% дегеннен артық көмектеседі.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем на тимот ГИСТ кој учествуваше во задачата „SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension“ (задача 12). Овде, ние се обраќаме на два предизвикувачки фактори: нестатуирани заеднички сетила и два лексички блиски налоги кои водат до контрадиктни тврдења. Клучна идеја за нашиот систем е целосна употреба на префрлање на учењето од задачата на природната јазична инференција (НЛИ) на оваа задача. Користевме Зајакнет секвенцијален инференциски модел (ЕСИМ) за да го научиме наборот на податоци на НЛИ. Опишуваме како да се користи ЕСИМ за трансфер на учење за да се избере точен налог преку предложен систем. Покажуваме споредливи резултати преку експерименти за аблација. Нашиот систем се рангираше на прво место меѓу 22 системи, надминувајќи ги сите системи повеќе од 10 отсто.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന നമ്മുടെ ജിസ്റ്റി ടീം സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു. പ ഇവിടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് വ്യാല്\u200dവെല്ലുവിളിക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു: സാധാരണമായ സെന്\u200dസുകളെയ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു കീ ഐഡിയ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഈ ജോലിയിലേക്ക് പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള NLI ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെക്കന്റല്\u200d ഇന്\u200dഫെര്\u200dഫനെന്\u200dസ് മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു. നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തിലൂടെ ശരിയായ വാറണ്ട് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനായി എസി തീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളിലൂടെ നമ്മള്\u200d തുല്യമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം 22 സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒന്നാമത്തെ റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്തു. എല്ലാ സിസ്റ്റമും 10 ശതമാനത്തിനു', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem pasukan GIST kami yang berpartisipasi dalam tugas Pemahaman Argumen SemEval-2018 (Tugas 12). Di sini, kita mengatasi dua faktor menantang: sensor umum yang tidak disebut dan dua waran yang dekat secara leksikal yang membawa kepada tuntutan yang bertentangan. Idea utama untuk sistem kita adalah penggunaan penuh pemindahan belajar dari tugas Bahasa Alami (NLI) ke tugas ini. Kami menggunakan Model Rentetan Sekuensi (ESIM) untuk belajar set data NLI. Kami menggambarkan bagaimana menggunakan ESIM untuk pemindahan belajar untuk memilih waran yang betul melalui sistem yang diusulkan. Kami menunjukkan hasil yang boleh dibandingkan melalui eksperimen ablasi. Our system ranked 1st among 22 systems, outperforming all the systems more than 10%.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний GIST багийн системийг SemEval-2018 Аргумент Reasoning Comprehension Task-д оролцсон аргументын шалтгааныг тайлбарладаг. Энд бид хоёр шаардлагатай хүчин зүйлсийг харуулж байна: ерөнхий мэдрэмж биш, хоёр сэтгэл зүйлсийн ойрхон зөвшөөрөгдөж буй зүйлсийг эсэргүүцдэг. Бидний системийн түлхүүр санаа бол Байгалийн хэл инференцийн (NLI) үйл ажилд суралцах үйлдлийг бүрэн ашиглах юм. Бид NLI өгөгдлийн санг суралцахын тулд нэмэгдсэн дарааллаар давхар загварыг ашигласан. Бид ESIM-г хэрхэн суралцах боломжтой болгохыг санал өгсөн системээс зөв эрх мэдлийг сонгохын тулд тайлбарлаж байна. Бид шалгалтын туршилтаар харьцуулагдах үр дүнг харуулж байна. Бидний систем 22 системээс 1-р хуваагдсан бөгөөд бүх системүүдийг 10-аас илүү ашиглаж чадна.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna tat-tim GIST li pparteċipat f’SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension task (Kompitu 12). Hawnhekk, nindirizzaw żewġ fatturi ta’ sfida: sensi komuni mhux statikati u żewġ ordnijiet lexikament mill-qrib li jwasslu għal dikjarazzjonijiet kontradittivi. Idea ewlenija għas-sistema tagħna hija l-użu sħiħ tat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment mill-kompitu tal-Inferenza tal-Lingwi Naturali (NLI) għal dan il-kompitu. Użat Mudell ta’ Inferenza Sekwenzjali mtejjeb (ESIM) biex nitgħallmu s-sett tad-dejta NLI. Aħna niddeskrivu kif għandna nużaw l-ESIM għat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment biex nagħżlu mandat korrett permezz ta’ sistema proposta. Aħna nuru riżultati komparabbli permezz ta’ esperimenti ta’ ablazzjoni. Our system ranked 1st among 22 systems, outperforming all the systems more than 10%.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma mūsų GIST grupės sistema, kuri dalyvavo 2018 m. pusmečio vertinime „Argumento pagrindimo supratimo užduotyje“ (12 užduotis). Čia sprendžiame du iššūkius keliančius veiksnius: nestatuotus bendrus protus ir du lexiškai glaudžius įsakymus, kurie lemia prieštaringus teiginius. Pagrindinmūsų sistemos idėja yra visiškas mokymosi gamtinėmis kalbomis (NLI) perkėlimas į šią užduotį. We used Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) to learn the NLI dataset.  Mes apibūdiname, kaip naudoti ESIM mokymuisi perkelti pasirinkti teisingą orderį pasitelkiant siūlomą sistemą. Atliekant abliacijos eksperimentus parodomi panašūs rezultatai. Mūsų sistema buvo pirmoji iš 22 sistemų, kurios viršijo visas sistemas daugiau kaip 10 proc.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru de echipă GIST care a participat la sarcina SemEval-2018 Argument Reationing Comprehension (Task 12). Aici abordăm doi factori provocatori: simțurile comune nesatisfăcute și două mandate lexicologic apropiate care duc la afirmații contradictorii. O idee cheie pentru sistemul nostru este utilizarea deplină a transferului de învățare de la sarcina Natural Language Inference (NLI) la această sarcină. Am folosit modelul de inferență secvențială îmbunătățită (ESIM) pentru a învăța setul de date NLI. Descriem modul în care se utilizează ESIM pentru transferul de învățare pentru a alege mandatul corect printr-un sistem propus. Avem rezultate comparabile prin experimente de ablaţie. Sistemul nostru s-a clasat pe locul 1 printre 22 de sisteme, depășind toate sistemele cu mai mult de 10%.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver GIST-gruppesystemet vårt som delta i semiEval-2018-argumentet Reasoning Comprehension task (oppgåve 12). Her adresserer vi to vanskeleg faktorer: ugjennomsiktige vanskelege senter og to lukke ordenarar som fører til kontradiktiv grenser. Ein nøkkelidee for systemet vårt er fullstendig bruk av overføring av læring frå den naturlege språkference (NLI) oppgåva til denne oppgåva. Vi brukte forstørra sekvensær inferensmedyl (ESIM) for å læra NLI- datasettet. Vi beskriver korleis ESIM skal brukast for å overføra læring for å velja korrekt garant gjennom eit foreslått system. Vi viser sammenlignbare resultat gjennom aktiveringseksperimenter. Sistemet vårt rangerte første mellom 22 systemer, som utfører alle systema meir enn 10%.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system zespołu GIST, który uczestniczył w zadaniu SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension (Zadanie 12). Zajmujemy się tutaj dwoma wyzwaniami: nieokreślonymi zdrowymi zmysłami oraz dwoma leksycznie bliskimi warunkami, które prowadzą do sprzecznych twierdzeń. Kluczowym pomysłem dla naszego systemu jest pełne wykorzystanie nauki transferowej z zadania Inference języka naturalnego (NLI) do tego zadania. Do nauki zbioru danych NLI użyliśmy rozszerzonego modelu sekwencyjnego inferencji (ESIM). Opisujemy, jak wykorzystać ESIM do nauki transferowej, aby wybrać poprawny warrant za pomocą proponowanego systemu. Wykazujemy porównywalne wyniki poprzez eksperymenty ablacyjne. Nasz system zajął pierwszy miejsce wśród 22 systemów, przewyższając wszystkie systemy ponad 10%.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš GIST tim sistem koji je sudjelovao u zadatku za osvajanje Argumenta za pola Evala-2018 (zadatak 12). Ovde se obraæamo dva izazovnog faktora: neobièna zajednička čula i dve leksièki bliske naloge koje vode do suprotnog tvrdnja. Ključna ideja za naš sistem je potpuna upotreba učenja prirodnog jezika sa zadatka NLI na ovaj zadatak. Koristili smo poboljšani sekvencijski model infekcije (ESIM) da naučimo setu podataka NLI. Mi opisujemo kako koristiti ESIM za prebacivanje učenja kako bi odabrali pravu nalog kroz predloženi sistem. Pokazujemo usporedbene rezultate kroz eksperimente. Naš sistem je bio prvi među 22 sistema, veći od 10%.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt GIST-teamsystem som deltog i SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension uppgift (Uppgift 12). Här tar vi upp två utmanande faktorer: oskyldiga gemensamma sinnen och två lexikalt nära warrants som leder till motstridiga påståenden. En viktig idé för vårt system är full användning av överföring av lärande från Natural Language Inference (NLI) uppgiften till denna uppgift. Vi använde Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) för att lära oss NLI-datauppsättningen. Vi beskriver hur man använder ESIM för transfer learning för att välja rätt fullmakt genom ett föreslaget system. Vi visar jämförbara resultat genom ablationsexperiment. Vårt system rankades 1:a bland 22 system och överträffade alla system mer än 10%.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ GIST කණ්ඩායම පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා සම්වෙල් 2018 ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් සම්ප්\u200dරේෂන් වැඩේ සම්ප්\u200dරේෂන් වැඩේ සම මෙන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් කරනවා: සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැති සහ ලෙක්සිකාලික වටින්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ව අපේ පද්ධතිය සඳහා යතුරු අදහසක් තමයි ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය (NLI) කාර්යයෙන් මේ වැඩේ ඉඳන් ප්\u200dරමාණ අපි NLI දත්ත සූදානය ඉගෙන ගන්න විශිෂ්ටම විශිෂ්ටම ප්\u200dරමාණය (ESIM) භාවිත කරනවා. අපි ESIM භාවිතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කොහොමද කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු පද්ධතියක් න අපි පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. අපේ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියක් පද්ධතිය 22ක් අතර පද්ධතියෙන් පත්තියෙන් පත්තියෙන් පත්තියෙන් 10% වඩ', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka GIST ee ka qayb galay SemEval-2018 Argument Reading Composition (Shaqada 12). Halkan, waxaynu u sheekaysanaynaa laba xaaladood oo dhibaataysan: qalabka caadiga ah oo aan la beddelin iyo labo ogolaanshiyo u dhow oo la xiriira dacwadda kala duwan. Fikirada muhiimka ah ee nidaamka waxaa buuxa isticmaalka waxbarashada ka wareejinta luqada asalka ah (NLI) shaqadaas. Waxaannu u isticmaalnay horumarinta ka dambeeya Inference Model (ESIM) si aan u barno danbiyada NLI. Waxaynu qoraynaa sida loo isticmaalayo ESIM si aan u wareejiyo waxbarashada si aan u dooranno ogolaanshiyaha saxda ah nidaam la soo jeeday. Waxaynu muujinnaa arimaha isbarbarka ah ee baaritaanka daboolidda. Systemkanagu wuxuu ka mid ahaa 22 nidaam, wuxuuna sameynayay nidaamka oo dhan in ka badan 10%.', 'ur': 'This paper describes our GIST team system that participated in SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension task (Task 12). یہاں، ہم دو مشکل فاکتوروں کے بارے میں مشکل کرتے ہیں: غیر مشکل معلومات اور دو زبان کے مطابق نزدیک واورینٹ جن کی مخالفت کی تعلیمات کی وجہ سے ہے. ہمارے سیسٹم کے لئے ایک کلی ایڈیون یہ کام کی طرف سے طبیعی زبان انفارنس (NLI) کے کام سے استعمال کرنے کے لئے کامل استعمال ہے. ہم نے NLI ڈاٹ سٹ کو سکھانے کے لئے زیادہ زیادہ سکنٹی انفارنس موڈل (ESIM) استعمال کیا۔ ہم نے ESIM کو کس طرح استعمال کر سکتے ہیں کہ ایک پیشنهاد سیسٹم کے ذریعہ درست وارنٹ انتخاب کریں۔ ہم ابلیس آزمائش کے ذریعے مقایسہ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں۔ ہمارا سیستم 22 سیستموں میں 1 درجہ تھا، تمام سیستموں سے 10% زیادہ زیادہ کام کرنے سے', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் செம்Eval-2018 புதுப்பித்தல் பணியில் பங்கிடப்பட்ட எங்கள் GIST அணி அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. இங்கே நாம் இரண்டு சவாலிக்கும் காரணங்களை விளக்குகிறோம்: பொதுவான உணர்வுகள் மற்றும் இரண்டு நெருங்கும் நெருங்கு எங்கள் கணினிக்கான முக்கிய ய கருத்து இயல்பான மொழி முகவரியிலிருந்து இந்த பணிக்கு மாற்றும் கற்றல் முழுமையாகும். நாங்கள் NLI தகவல் அமைப்பை கற்றுக் கொள்ள மேம்படுத்தி பின்னர் எதிர்பார்ப்பு மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தினோம். நாம் எப்படி ESIM பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்பதை விவரிக்கிறோம் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு மூலம் சரியான வார்த்தைய நாம் தீப்பு சோதனைகள் மூலம் ஒப்பிடும் முடிவுகளை காட்டுகிறோம். Our system ranked 1st among 22 systems, outperforming all the systems more than 10%.', 'uz': "This paper describes our GIST team system that participated in SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension task (Task 12).  Bu yerda, biz ikkita qiymatlar qo'llanmalarini boshqaramiz: umumiy sensonlarni o'zgartirib chiqaradi va ikkita leksikak yaqin huquqlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Bizning tizimmiz uchun muhim fikr bu vazifani tabiiy tilning boshqarish (NLI) vazifasidan o'rganishni butunlay foydalanadi. Comment Tahrirlangan tizim orqali to ʻgʻri huquqlarni tanlashni o'rganish uchun ESIM tilidan foydalanamiz. Biz o'xshash natijalarni tasavvur qilish orqali ko'rsamiz. Bizning tizimmiz 22 tizimdagi birinchi chegara, hamma tizimlarni 10% dan ortiq ishlab chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống GIST mà đã tham gia vào công việc hoàn toàn Lý lẽ Thuyết Tinh dịch (Task 12). Ở đây, chúng ta giải quyết hai yếu tố thách thức: các giác quan chung không xác định và hai cái trát trắng xóa gần nhau dẫn đến mâu thuẫn các yêu cầu. Một ý tưởng quan trọng cho hệ thống của chúng ta là sử dụng hoàn to àn việc học tập từ liên minh ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLI) cho nhiệm vụ này. Chúng tôi đã sử dụng Mô hình xâm phạm phức tạp (ESIM) để học bộ dữ liệu NLI. Chúng tôi mô tả cách sử dụng ESIM cho việc học chuyển nhượng để chọn trát chính xác qua một hệ thống đã đề nghị. Chúng tôi cho thấy kết quả có thể so sánh. Hệ thống của chúng tôi xếp hạng I.m. trong hệ thống 22, không còn đủ khả năng sử dụng.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft ons GIST-teamsysteem dat deelnam aan SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension taak (Task 12). Hier gaan we op twee uitdagende factoren aan de orde: onbeduidende gemeenschappelijke zintuigen en twee lexicaal nauwe warrants die leiden tot tegenstrijdige claims. Een belangrijk idee voor ons systeem is volledig gebruik van transferleren van de Natural Language Inference (NLI) taak naar deze taak. We gebruikten Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) om de NLI-dataset te leren. We beschrijven hoe ESIM gebruikt kan worden voor transfer learning om de juiste warrant te kiezen via een voorgesteld systeem. We laten vergelijkbare resultaten zien door middel van ablatie experimenten. Ons systeem scoorde 1e onder de 22-systemen en presteerde meer dan 10%.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата екипна система, участвала в задачата Разбиране на аргументите (задача 12). Тук разглеждаме два предизвикателни фактора: неопределени общи сетива и две лексически близки гаранции, които водят до противоречиви твърдения. Ключова идея за нашата система е пълноценното използване на трансферното обучение от задачата "Естествено езиково заключение" (НЛИ) към тази задача. Използвахме усъвършенстван последователен модел на заключение (ESIM), за да научим набора от данни NLI. Описваме как да използвате ЕСИМ за трансферно обучение, за да изберете правилната гаранция чрез предложена система. Показваме сравними резултати чрез аблационни експерименти. Нашата система се класира на първо място сред 22 системи, надминавайки всички системи с повече от 10%.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores GIST team system, der deltog i SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension opgave (Opgave 12). Her tager vi fat på to udfordrende faktorer: usikrede fælles sanser og to leksikologisk tætte kendelser, der fører til modstridende påstande. En nøgleidé for vores system er fuld brug af overførsel af læring fra Natural Language Inference (NLI) opgaven til denne opgave. Vi brugte Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) til at lære NLI datasættet. Vi beskriver, hvordan man bruger ESIM til transfer learning til at vælge korrekt warrant gennem et foreslået system. Vi viser sammenlignelige resultater gennem ablationseksperimenter. Vores system rangerede førstepladsen blandt 22 systemer, hvilket overgår alle systemer mere end 10%.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt unser GIST-Team-System, das an SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task (Task 12) teilgenommen hat. Dabei gehen wir auf zwei herausfordernde Faktoren ein: unausgesprochene Vernunft und zwei lexikalisch enge Warrants, die zu widersprüchlichen Behauptungen führen. Eine Schlüsselidee für unser System ist die vollständige Nutzung des Transferlernens von der Natural Language Inference (NLI)-Aufgabe zu dieser Aufgabe. Wir haben das Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) verwendet, um den NLI-Datensatz zu lernen. Wir beschreiben, wie ESIM für Transfer-Lernen verwendet wird, um den richtigen Warrant durch ein vorgeschlagenes System zu wählen. Wir zeigen vergleichbare Ergebnisse durch Ablationsexperimente. Unser System rangierte auf dem ersten Platz unter 22-Systemen und übertraf alle Systeme mehr als 10%.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš GIST tim sistem koji je sudjelovao u zadatku za osposobljavanje Argumenta za razvod kompresije (zadatak 12). Ovdje se obraćamo dvije izazovne faktore: neobične zajedničke čule i dvije leksički bliske naloge koje vode do suprotnih zahtjeva. Ključna ideja za naš sustav je puna upotreba učenja prijenosa iz zadatka prirodnog jezika (NLI) na ovaj zadatak. Koristili smo poboljšani sekvencijski model infekcije (ESIM) kako bi naučili setu podataka NLI. Opišemo kako koristiti ESIM za učenje prijenosa kako bi odabrali pravu nalog kroz predloženi sustav. Pokazat ćemo usporedbene rezultate kroz eksperimente ablacije. Naš sustav je bio prvi među 22 sustava, nadmažen svim sustavima više od 10%.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18 논증 추리 이해 임무(임무12)에 참여하는 GIST팀 시스템을 묘사한다.여기서 우리는 두 가지 도전적인 요소를 논의한다. 그것이 바로 미진술 상식과 서로 모순되는 주장을 초래하는 두 가지 어휘와 비슷한 주주권 취득증이다.우리 시스템의 관건적인 사상은 자연언어추리(NLI) 임무에서 이 임무로의 이동 학습을 충분히 이용하는 것이다.Enhanced 순차 추리 모델(ESIM)을 사용하여 NLI 데이터 세트를 학습합니다.ESIM을 사용하여 마이그레이션 학습을 수행하고 제안된 시스템에서 올바른 인증서를 선택하는 방법에 대해 설명합니다.우리는 소식 실험을 통해 유사한 결과를 나타냈다.우리 시스템은 22개 시스템 중 1위를 차지하며 모든 시스템의 10%를 넘어섰다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم تیم GIST ما را توصیف می\u200cکند که در عملیات آرژومی\u200cهای دلایل تأکید (کار ۱۲) شرکت می\u200cکنند. در اینجا، ما دو faktor سخت\u200cگیری را دریافت می\u200cکنیم: حس\u200cهای مشترک و دو حکومت\u200cهای زبانی نزدیک که باعث می\u200cشود به ادعا مخالفت کنند. ایده کلیدی برای سیستم ما کامل استفاده از تعلیم انتقال از وظیفهٔ تغییر زبان طبیعی (NLI) به این وظیفه است. ما برای یاد گرفتن مجموعه داده\u200cهای NLI از Model Inference Sequencial Advanced (ESIM) استفاده کردیم. ما توصیف می\u200cکنیم که چگونه استفاده از ESIM برای انتقال یادگیری برای انتقال اجازه درست را از طریق یک سیستم پیشنهاد استفاده کنیم. ما نتایج قابل مقایسه را از طریق آزمایشات فعالیت نشان می دهیم. سیستم ما در بین ۲۲ سیستم اولین درجه بود که بیشتر از ۱۰ درصد تمام سیستم ها را انجام می دهد.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz GIST topar sistemamyzy SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task (Task 12) içine goşulýar. Bu ýerde, biz iki çözümli faktöre adres ediyoruz: orta duýgular kesilmedik ve iki leksiýa ýakyn garanti gerekli sözlerine garşy eden garanti. Biziň sistemimiziň açyk ideýasy Natural Language Inference (NLI) zadyndan bu zada öwrenmek üçin doly ulanýar. NLI veri setini öwrenmek üçin Beýik Taýratyn nusgasyny (ESIM) ulandyk. Biz ESIM'i öwrenmek üçin dogry tarapyny saýlamak üçin nähili ulanmalydygy tasvir edip görýäris. Biz ablasyon deneyleri bilen ýakynlaşdyrylýan netijeleri görkez. Biziň sistemamyz 22 sistemlerden 1-nji dereje ýokary çykdy, hemme sistemalaryň 10-den gowydy.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons GIST-team stelsel wat gedeel het in SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension taak (Taak 12). Hier, ons adres twee pragtige faktore: ongestateerde gemeenskappe senses en twee leksies toemaak waarmee wat lei na kontrakteerde aandrukkings. 'n Sleutel idee vir ons stelsel is volledige gebruik van oordrag leer van die Natuurlike Taal Inferensie (NLI) taak na hierdie taak. Ons gebruik Verbeter Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) om die NLI datastel te leer. Ons beskrywe hoe ESIM gebruik moet word vir oordrag leer om korrekte waarmee te kies deur 'n voorgestelde stelsel. Ons wys vergelykbare resultate deur ablasie eksperimente. Ons stelsel het 1 rangeer tussen 22 stelsels, wat al die stelsels meer as 10%.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin tonë të ekipit GIST që mori pjesë në detyrën SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension (Task 12). Këtu, ne trajtojmë dy faktorë sfidues: ndjenja të përbashkëta të papërcaktuara dhe dy urdhëra lexikalisht të ngushta që shpien në pretendime kundërshtuese. Një ide kyçe për sistemin tonë është përdorimi i plotë i transferimit të mësimit nga detyra Natural Language Inference (NLI) në këtë detyrë. Ne përdorëm Modelin e Ndihmuar të Inferencës Sekuenciale (ESIM) për të mësuar të dhënat NLI. Ne përshkruajmë si të përdorim ESIM për transferimin e mësimit për të zgjedhur mandatin e saktë nëpërmjet një sistemi të propozuar. Ne tregojmë rezultate të krahasueshme nëpërmjet eksperimenteve të ablacionit. Sistemi ynë u rendit i pari midis 22 sistemeve, duke i kaluar të gjitha sistemet më shumë se 10%.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ԳԻՍՏ թիմի համակարգը, որը մասնակցել է 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ-2018" բանավեճի ընկալումների խնդիրը (12-րդ խնդիր): Այստեղ մենք դիտարկում ենք երկու մարտահրավեր ունեցող գործոններ\' անդասակարգված ընդհանուր զգացմունքներ և երկու լեքսիկապես մոտ պատվիրանքներ, որոնք հանգեցնում են հակառակ հայտարարություններին: Մեր համակարգի գլխավոր գաղափարն այն է, որ սովորելը բնական լեզվի ինֆերանսիայի (ՆԼԻ) խնդիրից այս խնդիրին ամբողջովին օգտագործվում է: Մենք օգտագործեցինք EnEnEnEnsed Sex Infer մոդելը (ԵՍԻՄ) ՆԼԻ տվյալների համակարգի սովորելու համար: Մենք նկարագրում ենք, թե ինչպես օգտագործել ԷՍԻՄ-ը սովորելու փոխանցման համար ճիշտ պատվիրան ընտրելու համար առաջարկված համակարգի միջոցով: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս համեմատական արդյունքներ աբլացիայի փորձարկումների միջոցով: Մեր համակարգը առաջինն էր 22 համակարգերի մեջ, որոնք գերազանցեցին բոլոր համակարգերը ավելի քան 10 տոկոսով:', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የስምEval-2018 አርጉም አካል ማድረግ ስራ (ስራ 12) ተካፈለ የGIST የድምፅ ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ ወደዚህ፣ ሁለትን የጥላቻ ውይይቶች እና ሁለትን ጥያቄዎችን በተቃራኒ የሚወስዱ የሊክሲካዊ ቅርብ ውርደት እና ሁለትን ጥያቄዎች እናገራለን፡፡ የስርዓታችን የቁልፍ አእምሮዎች ከዳርዓዊ ቋንቋ መግለጫ (NLI) ወደዚህ ስራ ለመቀበል የተጠቀመ ነው፡፡ የNLI ዳታ ሰርቨሮች ለመማር ተጠቀምን በጥያቄ ስርዓት የተፈጸመ ትእዛዝ ለመምረጥ እንዴት ESIM ን ለመቀበል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አቃጣይ ፈተና እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ስርዓታችን በ22 ስርዓቶች ውስጥ መጀመሪያ የተለየ ነው፡፡', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem tim GIST kami yang berpartisipasi di SemEval-2018 Argumen Reasoning Comprehension tugas (Tugas 12). Di sini, kita mengatasi dua faktor tantangan: sensor umum yang tidak disebutkan dan dua surat perintah yang dekat secara lexik yang membawa kepada klaim yang bertentangan. Ide kunci untuk sistem kita adalah penggunaan penuh dari transfer belajar dari tugas Natural Language Inference (NLI) ke tugas ini. Kami menggunakan Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) untuk belajar dataset NLI. Kami menggambarkan bagaimana menggunakan ESIM untuk transfer belajar untuk memilih surat perintah yang benar melalui sistem yang diusulkan. Kami menunjukkan hasil yang bisa dibandingkan melalui eksperimen ablasi. Our system ranked 1st among 22 systems, outperforming all the systems more than 10%.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu wa timu ya GIST ambao ulishiriki katika Msingi wa Kusoma Uhalalishaji (Kazi 12). Hapa, tunazungumzia sababu mbili za changamoto: hisia za kawaida zisizoendelea na vigezo viwili vya karibu vya lexico vinavyosababisha kupambana na madai. A key idea for our system is full use of transfer learning from the Natural Language Inference (NLI) task to this task.  Tulitumia Modeli ya Kungiliwa kwa mara nyingine (ESIM) kujifunza seti ya data za NLI. Tunaelezea namna ya kutumia ESIM kwa ajili ya kuhamisha kujifunza kuchagua ruhusa sahihi kupitia mfumo unaopendekezwa. Tunaonyesha matokeo yanafanana kupitia majaribio ya moto. Mfumo wetu ulikuwa wa kwanza kati ya mifumo 22, ukifanya mifumo yote zaidi ya asilimia 10.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা আমাদের জিএসটি টিম ব্যবস্থার ব্যাখ্যা করছে যা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ সালে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে আর্গুমেন্ট আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরায় এখানে আমরা দুটি চ্যালেঞ্জের বিষয়ের কথা বলি: সাধারণ সাধারণ বিষয় এবং দুটি লেক্সিক্সিক কাছাকাছি কাছাকাছি যারা দাবি বি আমাদের সিস্টেমের জন্য একটি প্রধান ধারণা পূর্ণ স্বাভাবিক ভাষা ইনফারেন্স (NLI) কাজের কাজ থেকে এই কাজের কাজে পরিণ এনলিআই ডাটাসেট শিখার জন্য আমরা ব্যবহার করেছিলাম সেকেন্ডারফেন্স মোডেল (ESIM)। প্রস্তাবিত একটি সিস্টেমের মাধ্যমে সঠিক ওয়ারেন্ট নির্বাচনের জন্য শিক্ষা পরিবর্তনের জন্য কিভাবে ESIM ব্যবহার আমরা আগুনের পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে তুলনার ফলাফল দেখাই। আমাদের সিস্টেম ২২ সিস্টেমের মধ্যে প্রথম রান্না হয়েছে, ১০ শতাংশেরও বেশি সিস্টেম প্রকাশ করেছে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem timova GIST-a koji je sudjelovao u zadatku za osvajanje Argumenta za pola Evala-2018 (zadatak 12). Ovdje se obraćamo na dva izazovnog faktora: neodređena zajednička čula i dvije leksički bliske naloge koje vode do suprotnog tvrdnja. Ključna ideja za naš sistem je puna upotreba učenja prijenosa iz zadatka prirodnog jezika (NLI) na ovaj zadatak. Koristili smo poboljšani sekvencijski model infekcije (ESIM) kako bi naučili setu podataka NLI. Mi opisujemo kako koristiti ESIM za učenje prijenosa kako bi odabrali pravu nalog kroz predloženi sistem. Pokazujemo usporedbene rezultate kroz eksperimente ablacije. Naš sistem je bio prvi među 22 sistema, nadmažen svim sistemima više od 10%.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim GIST team sistemimizi SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task (Task 12) ilə iştirak edir. Burada iki çətin faktör barəsində danışırıq: müəyyən edilməmiş ortaq hisslər və iki hekayətlə yaxın hökmlər tərəfindən mübahisə edirlər. Sistemimizin anahtar fikri təbiətli Dil Inference (NLI) işindən bu işə istifadə etməkdir. NLI veri quruluğunu öyrənmək üçün daha böyük Sequential Inference Modeli (ESIM) kullandıq. Biz ESIM öyrənmək üçün təklif edilmiş sistem vasitəsilə doğru warrant ı seçmək üçün necə istifadə ediləcəyini təsdiqləyirik. Biz ablasiya təcrübələri ilə qarşılaşdırılabilir sonuçları göstəririk. Sistemimiz 22 sistemlərin birinci dərəcəsi ilə, bütün sistemlərin 10-dən fazlasını üstün etdi.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema d'equip GIST que va participar a la tasca de comprensió de l'argumentació SemEval-2018 (tasca 12). Aquí ens ocupem de dos factors desafiants: sentits comuns no estatuats i dos ordres llexicament estrets que porten a reclamacions contradits. Una idea clau del nostre sistema és l'ús plen de l'aprenentatge de transfer ència de la tasca de la Inferència de Llingua Natural (NLI) a aquesta tasca. Vam utilitzar Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM) per aprendre el conjunt de dades NLI. Descrivem com utilitzar l'ESIM per a transferir l'aprenentatge per triar la mandat correcta a través d'un sistema proposat. Mostrem resultats comparables a través d'experiments d'ablació. El nostre sistema es va classificar en primer lloc entre 22 sistemes, superant tots els sistemes més del 10%.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš týmový systém GIST, který se podílel na úkolu SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension (Task 12). Zde se zabýváme dvěma náročnými faktory: nevyjádřenými zdravými smysly a dvěma lexicky blízkými zaručeními, které vedou k protichůdným tvrzením. Klíčovou myšlenkou pro náš systém je plné využití transferového učení z úkolu Inference přírodního jazyka (NLI) k tomuto úkolu. K učení datové sady NLI jsme použili rozšířený sekvenční inferenční model (ESIM). Popisujeme, jak použít ESIM pro přenosové učení k výběru správného zaručení prostřednictvím navrženého systému. Pomocí ablačních experimentů ukazujeme srovnatelné výsledky. Náš systém byl první mezi 22 systémy a překonal všechny systémy více než 10%.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie GIST meeskonna süsteemi, kes osales SemEval-2018 Argument Reasong Comprehension ülesandes (ülesanne 12). Siin käsitleme kahte keerulist tegurit: avaldamata terved meeled ja kaks leksikaalselt lähedast garantii, mis viivad vastuoluliste väiteteni. Meie süsteemi peamine idee on loodusliku keele järelduse (NLI) ülesande täielik kasutamine sellele ülesandele. NLI andmekogumi õppimiseks kasutasime täiustatud järjestikuse järelduse mudelit (ESIM). Kirjeldame, kuidas kasutada ESIM-i siirdeõppeks, et valida õige garantii kavandatud süsteemi kaudu. Näitame võrreldavaid tulemusi läbi ablatsioonikatsete. Meie süsteem oli 22 süsteemi seas esimene, ületades kõiki süsteeme rohkem kui 10%.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan GIST-tiimijärjestelmäämme, joka osallistui SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension -tehtävään (tehtävä 12). Käsittelemme tässä kahta haastavaa tekijää: ilmaisemattomia terveitä aisteja ja kahta sanastollisesti läheistä pidätysmääräystä, jotka johtavat ristiriitaisiin väitteisiin. Järjestelmämme keskeinen idea on siirtää oppimista luonnollisen kielen inference (NLI) -tehtävästä tähän tehtävään. Käytimme Enhanced Sequential Inference Modelia (ESIM) NLI-aineiston oppimiseen. Kuvaamme, miten ESIM:ää käytetään siirtooppimiseen oikean takuun valitsemiseksi ehdotetun järjestelmän kautta. Osoitamme vertailukelpoisia tuloksia ablaatiokokeilla. Järjestelmämme sijoittui ensimmäiseksi 22 järjestelmän joukossa, ylittäen kaikki järjestelmät yli 10%.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš GIST timski sistem, ki je sodeloval v nalogi razumevanja argumentov SemEval-2018 (naloga 12). V tem primeru obravnavamo dva izzivna dejavnika: neostavljena zdrava čutila in dva leksično tesna naloga, ki vodita v nasprotujoče trditve. Ključna ideja za naš sistem je polna uporaba prenosnega učenja iz naloge sklepanja naravnega jezika (NLI) na to nalogo. Za učenje nabora podatkov NLI smo uporabili Enhanced Sequential Inference Model (ESIM). Opisujemo, kako uporabljati ESIM za transferno učenje za izbiro pravilnega jamstva prek predlaganega sistema. Primerljive rezultate pokažemo preko ablacijskih poskusov. Naš sistem se je uvrstil na prvo mesto med 22 sistemi, saj je več kot 10% boljši od vseh sistemov.', 'he': 'This paper describes our GIST team system that participated in SemEval-2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension task (Task 12).  כאן, אנו מתייחסים לשני גורמים מאתגרים: חושים משותפים בלתי מצוינים ושני צווים סגורים ללקסית שמובילים לתבועות מתנגדות. רעיון מפתח למערכת שלנו הוא השימוש מלא של ההעברה ללמוד מהמשימה של השפה הטבעית (NLI) למשימה זו. השתמשנו במדל השדרה השתפר (ESIM) כדי ללמוד את קבוצת הנתונים NLI. אנחנו מתארים איך להשתמש ב ESIM כדי להעביר לימוד לבחור צו נכון דרך מערכת מוצעת. We show comparable results through ablation experiments.  המערכת שלנו התייצבה הראשונה בין 22 מערכות, מעליפה את כל המערכות יותר מ-10%.', 'jv': 'Ngeruhaan iki rambarang kelompok nggawe GIRT karbot sistem sing bisa ngulinakake seminval-2008 Awak dhéwé, kéné ngerasakno iki karo nggawe barang nggawe: Seneng beraksi barêng lan didasakno sing beraksi kuwi tindakan pakan. iku Awak dhéwé nggambar Daftar NLI Sistem Daftar Puteran (ESEM) nggawe Awak dhéwé ngerti kung éwé nggunakake ESEM kanggo ngerakake Awak dhéwé éntuk gorasakno dadi karo akeh operasi Sistem-sistem sing ditambah tanggal 1-uwong sing 22 sistem, iso nggolang gawe sistem sing wis 10%.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana system na GIS wanda ya yi shirin na SemEV-2018 Argument Recursion Comprehension (Tafiyar 12). Wannan, munã haɗi da matsayin biyu masu motsi: sabon da aka bada ma'anar jama'a da kuma ma'anar marubuci biyu masu kiyaye. A key idea for our system is full use of transfer learning from the Natural Language Inference (NLI) task to this task.  Mun yi amfani da Model na Bayyade Infekt na Bayan Dakata (ESIM) zuwa an sanar da tsarin database na NLI. Tuna bayyana yadda za'a yi amfani da ESIM don a shige wa zana iya amfani da kwamfyuta tsarin da za'a zãɓi inganci mai daidaita a cikin wani tsarin da aka buƙata. Kana nũna matsalar da ke kamata a samun jarrabai na wuta. Sisteminmu na ranar ta farko daga na'ura 22, na sami duk na'ura 10%.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་GIST དྲ་རྒྱའི་མ་ལག་གི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ལ་SemEval འདིར་ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་དག་གི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གཉིས་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་ལ་གཙོ་ཆེ་ཤོས་དེ་རང་རིག་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་NLI གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་ལ་རྒྱས་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་(ESIM)སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ESIM སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བདེན་བཤད་པ་ལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་རྟོགས་ནུས། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་པའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྡུར་བཏུབ་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་མངོན་འཆར། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་མ་ལག་གི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཉིས་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་དེ་ནའང་མ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟ'}
{'en': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'ar': 'LightRel في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: تصنيف العلاقة خفيف الوزن وسريع', 'es': 'LightRel en la Tarea 7 de SemEval-2018: Clasificación de relaciones ligeras y rápidas', 'pt': 'LightRel na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Classificação de relação leve e rápida', 'fr': 'LightRel à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Classification des relations légères et rapides', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のLightRelタスク7 ：軽量で高速な関係分類', 'zh': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 任 7:轻量级与速类', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 पर LightRel: हल्के और तेजी से संबंध वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'LightRel на SemEval-2018 Задача 7: Легкая и быстрая классификация отношений', 'ga': 'LightRel ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Aicmiú Caidreamh Éadrom agus Mear', 'ka': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relations Classification', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Ελαφριά και γρήγορη ταξινόμηση σχέσεων', 'hu': 'LightRel a SemEval-2018 feladat 7: könnyű és gyors kapcsolatok osztályozása', 'it': 'LightRel a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classificazione delle relazioni leggere e veloci', 'kk': 'LightRel at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relations Classification', 'lt': 'LightRel, SemEval-2018, 7 užduotis: lengvas ir greitas ryšys', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7- ല്\u200d ഇളംRel: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'mn': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'mk': 'LightRel на SemEval-2018 задача 7: Лесна и брза класификација', 'no': 'LightRel at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'ms': 'LightRel pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Klasifikasi Hubungan Mudah dan Cepat', 'mt': 'LightRel f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7: Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Relazzjoni ħafifa u mgħaġġla', 'sr': 'LightRel na semiEval-2018 Task 7: klasifikacija lakše težine i brze odnose', 'so': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'ro': 'LightRel la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 7: Clasificarea relațiilor ușoare și rapide', 'sv': 'LightRel på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Lätt och snabb relationsklassificering', 'pl': 'LightRel w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 7: Lekka i szybka klasyfikacja relacji', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 7: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'ur': 'سائموئل-2018 ٹاکس 7 میں لایٹریل: لایٹوز اور تیز رابطہ کلاسیفی', 'si': 'Light REL at HalfEvel-2018 Job 7: Light weight and Fast Reference Classication', 'uz': 'Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'vi': 'Light Rell at SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 7: dễ thấy và Sắp xếp nhanh.', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Класификация на леките и бързите взаимоотношения', 'da': 'LightRel på SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Letvægt og hurtig Relation Klassificering', 'hr': 'LightRel na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: klasifikacija lakše težine i brze odnose', 'nl': 'LightRel bij SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Lichtgewicht en Snelle Relatieclassificatie', 'de': 'LightRel bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 7: Leichte und schnelle Relationsklassifikation', 'id': 'LightRel di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Klasifikasi Hubungan Mudah dan Cepat', 'fa': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relations Classification', 'ko': 'SemEval-18에서 LightRel의 작업 7: 경량급과 빠른 관계 분류', 'tr': 'Hat', 'sw': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'af': 'LightRel by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 7: Ligte gewig en vinnige Relasifikasie', 'am': 'Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'sq': 'LightRel në SemEval-2018 Task 7: Klasifikim i lidhjes së lehtë dhe të shpejtë', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'LightRel na semiEval-2018 Task 7: klasifikacija lakše težine i brze odnose', 'az': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ 7: লাইট ওজন এবং দ্রুত সম্পর্ক ক্লাসিশন', 'cs': 'Úkol 7: Lehká a rychlá klasifikace vztahů', 'et': 'LightRel SemEval-2018 ülesanne 7: kerge ja kiire suhte klassifikatsioon', 'fi': 'LightRel SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Kevyt ja nopea suhde luokitus', 'ca': 'LightRel a SemEval-2018 tasca 7: Classificació de relació fàcil i ràpida', 'jv': 'brightRel at semiinval-2008 task 7: bright and fast Relation', 'ha': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification', 'he': 'LightRel ב SemEval-2018 משימה 7: קליфікаציה בקשר קל ומהיר', 'sk': 'LightRel na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Razvrstitev lahkih in hitrih odnosov', 'bo': 'LightRel at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Lightweight and Fast Relation Classification'}
{'en': 'We present LightRel, a lightweight and fast relation classifier. Our goal is to develop a high baseline for different relation extraction tasks. By defining only very few data-internal, word-level features and external knowledge sources in the form of word clusters and word embeddings, we train a fast and simple linear classifier', 'ar': 'نقدم LightRel ، مصنف علاقة خفيف الوزن وسريع. هدفنا هو تطوير خط أساس عالي لمختلف مهام استخراج العلاقة. من خلال تحديد عدد قليل جدًا من ميزات البيانات الداخلية وعلى مستوى الكلمات ومصادر المعرفة الخارجية في شكل مجموعات الكلمات وتضمين الكلمات ، فإننا ندرب مصنفًا خطيًا سريعًا وبسيطًا', 'pt': 'Apresentamos LightRel, um classificador de relações leve e rápido. Nosso objetivo é desenvolver uma linha de base alta para diferentes tarefas de extração de relações. Ao definir apenas alguns recursos internos de dados, em nível de palavra e fontes externas de conhecimento na forma de agrupamentos de palavras e embeddings de palavras, treinamos um classificador linear rápido e simples', 'es': 'Presentamos LightRel, un clasificador de relaciones ligero y rápido. Nuestro objetivo es desarrollar una base alta para las diferentes tareas de extracción de relaciones. Al definir solo muy pocas características internas de datos, a nivel de palabras y fuentes de conocimiento externas en forma de grupos de palabras e incrustaciones de palabras, entrenamos un clasificador lineal rápido y simple', 'fr': "Nous présentons LightRel, un classificateur de relations léger et rapide. Notre objectif est de développer une base de référence élevée pour différentes tâches d'extraction de relations. En ne définissant que très peu de caractéristiques internes aux données au niveau des mots et de sources de connaissances externes sous forme de groupes de mots et d'intégrations de mots, nous formons un classificateur linéaire rapide et simple", 'ja': '軽量で高速なリレーションシップ分類子であるLightRelをご紹介します。私たちの目標は、さまざまな関係抽出タスクの高いベースラインを開発することです。ワードクラスタやワード埋め込みの形で、わずかなデータ内部、ワードレベルの機能と外部の知識源のみを定義することで、私たちは高速でシンプルな線形分類器をトレーニングします', 'hi': 'हम LightRel, एक हल्के और तेजी से संबंध क्लासिफायर प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारा लक्ष्य विभिन्न संबंध निष्कर्षण कार्यों के लिए एक उच्च आधार रेखा विकसित करना है। शब्द समूहों और शब्द एम्बेडिंग के रूप में केवल बहुत कम डेटा-आंतरिक, शब्द-स्तरीय सुविधाओं और बाहरी ज्ञान स्रोतों को परिभाषित करके, हम एक तेज और सरल रैखिक क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं', 'zh': '吾言LightRel,轻量级速之类也。 所以异务开高基线。 以词簇词嵌文定义甚少之数内,单词特徵外识,练一速而简线性分类器。', 'ru': 'Представляем LightRel, легкий и быстрый классификатор отношений. Наша цель - разработать высокий базовый уровень для различных задач извлечения отношений. Определяя только очень немногие внутренние данные, особенности на уровне слов и внешние источники знаний в виде кластеров слов и вложений слов, мы обучаем быстрый и простой линейный классификатор', 'ga': 'Cuirimid LightRel i láthair, aicmitheoir caidreamh éadrom tapa. Is é an sprioc atá againn bunlíne ard a fhorbairt le haghaidh tascanna éagsúla asbhainte caidrimh. Trí ach fíorbheagán sonraí inmheánacha, gnéithe leibhéal focal agus foinsí seachtracha eolais a shainiú i bhfoirm braislí focal agus leabaithe focal, cuirimid oiliúint ar aicmitheoir líneach tapa agus simplí.', 'el': 'Σας παρουσιάζουμε έναν ελαφρύ και γρήγορο ταξινομητή σχέσεων. Στόχος μας είναι να αναπτύξουμε μια υψηλή βάση για διαφορετικές εργασίες εξαγωγής σχέσεων. Καθορίζοντας μόνο ελάχιστα δεδομένα-εσωτερικά χαρακτηριστικά σε επίπεδο λέξεων και εξωτερικές πηγές γνώσης με τη μορφή συστάδων λέξεων και ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, εκπαιδεύουμε έναν γρήγορο και απλό γραμμικό ταξινομητή', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a LightRel-t, egy könnyű és gyors kapcsolat osztályozót. Célunk, hogy a különböző kapcsolatkivonási feladatokhoz magas alapot alakítsunk ki. Azáltal, hogy csak nagyon kevés adat-belső, szószintű funkciót és külső tudásforrást definiálunk szóklaszterek és szóbeágyazások formájában, gyors és egyszerű lineáris osztályozót képzünk', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გაჩვენებთ LightRel, სიმაღლე და ბრძელი კლასიფიკაცია. ჩვენი მიზეზი არის განვითარება სხვადასხვა შესახებ ექსტრექციის საქმებისთვის მეტი ფესტლინის განვითარება. მხოლოდ რამდენიმე მონაცემები-ინტერული, სიტყვების განსაზღვრებით და გარეშე მეცნიერების ფორმაში სიტყვების კლასტერის და სიტყვების შემოწყვების ფორმაში, ჩვენ სწავლავთ ბრ', 'it': 'Vi presentiamo LightRel, un classificatore di relazioni leggero e veloce. Il nostro obiettivo è quello di sviluppare una base di riferimento elevata per diversi compiti di estrazione delle relazioni. Definindo solo pochissime caratteristiche interne ai dati, a livello di parole e fonti esterne di conoscenza sotto forma di cluster di parole e incorporazioni di parole, addestriamo un classificatore lineare veloce e semplice', 'lt': 'We present LightRel, a lightweight and fast relation classifier.  Mūsų tikslas – sukurti aukštą bazę skirtingoms santykių gavybos užduotims. Nustatydami tik labai nedaug duomenų vidinių, žodžių lygio savybių ir išorinių žinių šaltinių žodžių klasterių ir žodžių įtraukimo formos, mes mokome greitą ir paprastą linijinį klasifikatorių.', 'mk': 'Го претставуваме LightRel, лесен и брз класификатор на врски. Нашата цел е да развиеме висока основа за различни задачи за извлекување врски. Со дефинирање на само неколку внатрешни податоци, карактеристики на зборови и надворешни извори на знаење во форма на зборови кластери и зборови вградени, тренираме брз и едноставен линијарен класификатор', 'kk': 'LightRel дегенді жеткілікті және жылдам қатынас классификациясы көрсетеді. Біздің мақсатымыз - басқа қатынастарды тарқату тапсырмаларының негізгі жолын құру. Кластер мен сөздерді ендіру түрінде тек бірнеше деректер ішкі, сөздер деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктерді және сыртқы білім көзін анықтап', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan LightRel, pengklasifikasi hubungan ringan dan cepat. Tujuan kita adalah untuk mengembangkan dasar tinggi untuk tugas ekstraksi hubungan yang berbeza. Dengan menentukan hanya sedikit ciri-ciri data-dalaman, aras-perkataan dan sumber pengetahuan luaran dalam bentuk kumpulan perkataan dan penyampilan perkataan, kita melatih pengklasifikasi linear yang cepat dan sederhana', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ലൈറ്റ് റെല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, വേഗത്തിലെ ബന്ധവിഭാഗവും. നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം വ്യത്യസ്ത ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200d വാക്ക് ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200dസും വാക്കുകളും പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവിന്റെ സ്രോതസ്സുകളും വാക്കിന്റെ അകത്തുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ രൂപത്തി', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw LightRel, klassifikatur ta’ relazzjoni ħafifa u rapida. L-għan tagħna huwa li niżviluppaw linja bażi għolja għal kompiti differenti ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet. Billi niddefinixxu biss ftit karatteristiċi interni tad-dejta, fil-livell tal-kliem u sorsi esterni tal-għarfien fil-form a ta’ raggruppamenti tal-kliem u inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem, a ħna nħarrġu klassifikatur lineari rapidu u sempliċi', 'mn': 'Бид LightRel-г хялбар, хурдан харилцааны түвшинд танилцуулдаг. Бидний зорилго бол өөр харилцаа гаргах үйл ажиллагаанд өндөр суурь шугам хөгжүүлэх юм. Зөвхөн маш хэцүү өгөгдлийн дотор, үг түвшин болон гадаад мэдлэг эх үүсвэрүүдийг хэлбэрээр хэлбэрээр хэлбэрээр бид хурдан, хялбар шугам хэлбэрийг суралцдаг.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer LightRel, ei lett og rask relasjonsklassifisering. Målet vårt er å utvikla ein høg baseline for ulike relasjonsoppgåver for utpakking. Ved å definera berre svært få data-interne, ordnivå-funksjonar og eksterne kunnskjelder i form av ordklassar og ordinnbøying, treng vi ein rask og enkel lineær klassifisering', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy LightRel, lekki i szybki klasyfikator relacji. Naszym celem jest opracowanie wysokiej bazy podstawowej dla różnych zadań ekstrakcji relacji. Definiując tylko bardzo niewiele danych wewnętrznych, słownych cech i zewnętrznych źródeł wiedzy w postaci klastrów słów i osadzeń słów, szkolimy szybki i prosty klasyfikator liniowy', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm LightRel, un clasificator de relații ușor și rapid. Scopul nostru este de a dezvolta o bază de referință ridicată pentru diferite sarcini de extragere a relațiilor. Definind doar foarte puține caracteristici interne de date, la nivel de cuvinte și surse externe de cunoștințe sub formă de grupuri de cuvinte și încorporări de cuvinte, instruim un clasificator liniar rapid și simplu', 'si': 'අපි ලයිට්රෙල්ව පෙන්වන්නම්, ලොකු බලයක් හා වේගයෙන් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂකයක්. අපේ අරමුණ තමයි වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ විදියට පිළිගන්න වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් අධාර්ථ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ව අපි වේගයෙන් සහ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් විතරයි.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo LightRel, laku težinu i brzu povezanost. Naš cilj je da razvijemo visoku osnovnu liniju za različite zadatke izvlačenja odnosa. Definirajući samo nekoliko podataka-unutrašnjih, rečnih karakteristika i vanjskih izvora znanja u obliku skupina riječi i integracije riječi, treniramo brzu i jednostavnu linearnu klasifikaciju', 'so': 'Waxaynu keenaynaa LightRel, kooxa xiriir fudud iyo fudud. Ujeedkeennu waa in uu horumariyo shabakad sare oo loo sameeyo shaqaalaha soo saarista kala duduwan. Si aan ugu qorno macluumaad yar oo gudaha ah, heer-heer iyo sourcees aqoonta dibadda ah oo u eg qoraalka iyo qoraalka, waxaynu tababarinnaa fasax fudud oo fudud', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar LightRel, en lätt och snabb relationsklassificering. Vårt mål är att utveckla en hög baslinje för olika relationsextraktionsuppgifter. Genom att definiera endast ett fåtal datainterna funktioner på ordnivå och externa kunskapskällor i form av ordkluster och ordinbäddningar utbildar vi en snabb och enkel linjär klassificerare', 'ta': 'நாம் மின்னல் Rel, ஒரு எளிதான மற்றும் வேகமான தொடர்பு வகுப்பாளர். எங்கள் இலக்கு வேறு தொடர்பு வெளிப்படுத்தும் பணிகளுக்கு உயர் அடிப்படை வரிசையை உருவாக்குவது தான். மிகவும் சில தகவல் உள்ளார்ந்த, வார்த்தை மட்டும் நிலையின் குணங்கள் மற்றும் வெளி அறிவு மூலங்களை வரையறுக்கிறது, வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடும் வார', 'ur': 'ہم LightRel کو ایک ہلکا وزن اور سریع رابطہ کا کلاسیر بناتے ہیں ہمارا مقصد یہ ہے کہ مختلف رابطہ اٹھانے کے کاموں کے لئے ایک بلند بنسس لین ایجاد کریں۔ صرف بہت کم ڈیٹا-داخلی، لفظ-لفظ اور خارجی علم سورج کی تعریف کے ذریعے لفظ کلسٹر اور لفظ انڈوبینگ کی شکل میں، ہم ایک سریع اور ساده لینیاری کلسٹر کی تعریف کرتے ہیں', 'uz': "Biz oddiy Rel, oddiy va tez bog'liq darajasi. Bizning maqsadimiz boshqa aloqalarni chiqarish vazifalari uchun yuqori asboblarni yaratish. Faqat faqat bir nechta ma'lumot ichki, so'zlar darajasi xossalarini aniqlash va tashqi taʼminot manbaslarini so'zlar va so'zlar tuzuvchisining shaklida o'rganamiz, biz tez va oddiy satr darajasini o'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu LightRell, một chuyên gia liên quan nhẹ và nhanh. Mục tiêu của chúng ta là phát triển một cơ sở cơ bản cao cho các nhiệm vụ phân phối. Chỉ cần xác định rất ít tính năng nội bộ dữ liệu, từ cấp độ và nguồn hiểu biết bên ngoài dưới dạng cụm từ và sự nhúng tay từ, chúng tôi sẽ đào tạo một phân loại nhanh và đơn giản', 'bg': 'Представяме ви лек и бърз класификатор на отношенията. Нашата цел е да разработим висока база за различни задачи за извличане на връзки. Чрез дефиниране на много малко вътрешни функции на данни и външни източници на знания под формата на словни клъстери и вграждания на думи, ние обучаваме бърз и прост линеен класификатор', 'nl': 'We presenteren LightRel, een lichtgewicht en snelle relatiecolassificator. Ons doel is om een hoge baseline te ontwikkelen voor verschillende relaties extractie taken. Door slechts zeer weinig data-interne functies op woordniveau en externe kennisbronnen te definiëren in de vorm van woordclusters en woordembeddingen, trainen we een snelle en eenvoudige lineaire classificator', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo LightRel, laku težinu i brzu povezanost. Naš cilj je razvoj visokog početnog linije za različite zadatke izvlačenja odnosa. Definirajući samo malo podataka unutrašnjih, riječnih karakteristika i vanjskih izvora znanja u obliku skupina riječi i ugrađenja riječi, treniramo brzu i jednostavnu linearnu klasifikaciju', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer LightRel, en let og hurtig relation klassificerer. Vores mål er at udvikle en høj baseline for forskellige relationsudvindingsopgaver. Ved kun at definere meget få data-interne, ordniveau funktioner og eksterne videnkilder i form af ordklynger og ordindlejringer, træner vi en hurtig og enkel lineær klassificering', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren LightRel, einen leichten und schnellen Beziehungsklassifikator. Unser Ziel ist es, eine hohe Basis für verschiedene Beziehungsextraktionsaufgaben zu entwickeln. Durch die Definition von nur sehr wenigen dateninternen, wortbasierten Merkmalen und externen Wissensquellen in Form von Wortclustern und Worteinbettungen trainieren wir einen schnellen und einfachen linearen Klassifikator', 'ko': '라이트 릴, 경량급 빠른 관계 분류기를 소개했다.우리의 목표는 서로 다른 관계 추출 임무를 위해 높은 기선을 세우는 것이다.어구와 어구의 삽입 형식으로 매우 적은 내부 데이터, 어급 특징과 외부 지식원을 정의함으로써 우리는 신속하고 간단한 선형 분류기를 훈련시켰다', 'fa': 'ما LightRel را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک رابطه\u200cگر و سریع\u200cگر. هدف ما اینه که یک خط پایین بالا برای مسائل استخراج متفاوت توسعه کنیم. با تعریف فقط کمی از ویژه\u200cهای داخلی، سطح کلمات و منبع دانش خارجی در شکل کلمات و جمع کردن کلمات، ما یک سریع و ساده راهنمایی خط\u200cشناسی را آموزش می\u200cدهیم', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan LightRel, klasifikasi hubungan ringan dan cepat. Tujuan kita adalah mengembangkan dasar tinggi untuk tugas ekstraksi hubungan yang berbeda. Dengan mendefinisikan hanya sedikit ciri-ciri data-internal, tingkat kata dan sumber pengetahuan luar dalam bentuk kelompok kata dan penyampilan kata, kami melatih sebuah klasifikasi linear yang cepat dan sederhana', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë LightRel, një klasifikues i lehtë dhe të shpejtë marrëdhënie. Qëllimi ynë është të zhvillojmë një bazë të lartë për detyra të ndryshme të nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve. Duke përcaktuar vetëm pak karakteristika të brendshme të të dhënave, niveli i fjalëve dhe burime të jashtme të njohurive në form ën e grupeve të fjalëve dhe përfshirjeve të fjalëve, ne trajnojmë një klasifikues linear të shpejtë dhe të thjeshtë', 'sw': 'We present LightRel, a lightweight and fast relation classifier.  Lengo letu ni kutengeneza msingi wa juu kwa kazi tofauti za utoaji wa uhusiano. Kwa kuelezea taarifa chache tu za ndani, maarifa ya kiwango cha maneno na vyanzo vya maarifa ya nje kwa namna ya viungo vya maneno na maneno yanavyotumika, tunamfundisha mgawanyiko wa haraka na rahisi wa simu', 'af': "Ons stel LightRel voor 'n liggewig en vinnige verhouding klassifiseerder. Ons doel is om 'n hoë basislien te ontwikkel vir verskillende verhouding van uitpakking opdragte. Deur te definieer slegs baie paar data-interne, woord-vlak-funksies en eksterne kennis bronne in die vorm van woordklassters en woord inbettings, tref ons 'n vinnige en eenvoudige lineêre klassifiseerder", 'tr': "Hat Rel'i, hızlı ve hızlı bir ilişki klasifikatörüne gösteriyoruz. Biziň maksadymyz ýokary çykyş uzmanlary üçin ýokary çykyş çyzygyny bejermek. Diňe az data-içi, söz derejesi we daşaryk bilim çeşmelerini kelime cluster we söz integrasy şeklinde tanımlayarak çalt we basit çyzgylyň klasifikasyny öwredýäris", 'am': 'ቀላል እና ፈጥኖ ግንኙነት መፍጠርን እናቀርባለን፡፡ የልዩ ግንኙነት ስራዎችን ለመሥራት ከፍተኛ የደረጃ መደገፊያ ነው፡፡ በጥቂት የዳታ-ውይይት፣ የቃላት ደረጃዎች እና ውጭ እውቀት ምንጮች በንግግር ክፍተት እና ቃላት ማሳየት ብቻ ሲሆን፣ ፈጥኖ እና ቀላል የመስመር ክፍተቶችን እናስተምራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Լայթրել, թեթև և արագ հարաբերությունների դասակարգիչ: Մեր նպատակն է զարգացնել բարձր հիմք տարբեր հարաբերությունների վերացման խնդիրների համար: Մենք որոշում ենք միայն շատ քիչ տվյալների ներքին, բառի մակարդակի և արտաքին գիտելիքների աղբյուրներ բառերի խմբերի և բառերի ներգրավման ձևով, մենք վարժեցնում ենք արագ և պարզ գծային դասակարգում', 'bn': 'আমরা লাইটরেল, হাল্কা এবং দ্রুত সম্পর্ক বিভক্ত। আমাদের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে বিভিন্ন সম্পর্ক বিনিময়ের কাজের জন্য একটি উচ্চ মেসেলাইন তৈরি করা। শব্দ ক্লাস্টার এবং শব্দ বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন স্থানের মাধ্যমে শুধুমাত্র কয়েকটি তথ্য-আভ্যন্তরীণ, শব্দ-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং বাইরের জ্ঞান', 'ca': "Presentem LightRel, un classificador lliure i ràpid de relacions. El nostre objectiu és desenvolupar una alta base per a diferents tasques d'extracció de relacions. By defining only very few data-internal, word-level features and external knowledge sources in the form of word clusters and word embeddings, we train a fast and simple linear classifier", 'cs': 'Představujeme LightRel, lehký a rychlý klasifikátor vztahů. Naším cílem je vytvořit vysoký základ pro různé úkoly extrakce vztahů. Definováním pouze velmi málo datových interních, slovních vlastností a externích zdrojů znalostí ve formě slovních clusterů a vložení slov trénujeme rychlý a jednoduchý lineární klasifikátor', 'et': 'Esitleme LightRel, kerge ja kiire suhete klassifitseerija. Meie eesmärk on töötada välja kõrge lähtealus erinevate suhete ekstraheerimise ülesannete jaoks. Määratledes ainult väga vähesed andmesisesed, sõnatasemel funktsioonid ja välised teadmisallikad sõnaklastrite ja sõnade manustamise kujul, koolitame kiiret ja lihtsat lineaarset klassifikaatorit', 'fi': 'Esittelemme LightRelin, kevyen ja nopean suhdeluokituksen. Tavoitteenamme on kehittää korkeatasoinen lähtötaso erilaisille relaatioiden uuttamistehtäville. Määrittelemällä vain hyvin vähän datan sisäisiä, sanatason ominaisuuksia ja ulkoisia tietolähteitä sanaklustereiden ja sanaupotusten muodossa koulutamme nopean ja yksinkertaisen lineaarisen luokittelijan.', 'az': "Biz LightRel'i, yüngül və hızlı ilişkili seçdik. Bizim məqsədimiz, müxtəlif əlaqələr çıxartmaq məqsədilə yüksək sətir təhsil etməkdir. Sadəcə çox az veri-içəri, söz-səviyyəsi və dış bilgi kaynaklarını sözlərin və sözlərin birləşdirilməsi kimi təsdiqləyici olaraq,", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo LightRel, laku težinu i brzu povezanost. Naš cilj je da razvijemo visoku osnovnu liniju za različite zadatke izvlačenja odnosa. Definirajući samo malo podataka unutrašnjih, rečnih karakteristika i vanjskih izvora znanja u obliku skupina riječi i ugrađenja riječi, treniramo brzu i jednostavnu linearnu klasifikaciju', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk HellRel, nggampang luwih lan kelas nang ngerasar Kita goal punika nggawe sistem sing paling-sistem sing luwih kanggo ngerasai tanggal neng sampeyan Yuta ngerasai barang langkung dadi-barang, langkung-barang langkung karo mulasai gambar kelas telu', 'ha': "Munã halatar da LirraRel, wani mai sauƙi da mai haɗuwa da haraka. Gayinmu ne ya ƙãga wani matsayi mai daraja wa aikin masu husũma daban-daban. Ina bayyana kawai masu kaɗan na masu cikin-data guda, masu fassarar-leveli da sourcen saniya na ƙarƙashin da ke cikin form of word clubs and word embedded, za'a yi amfani da mai fassarwa mai sauri da sauƙi", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים LightRel, קלאס קל ומהיר יחסים. המטרה שלנו היא לפתח בסיס גבוה עבור משימות חולץ יחסים שונות. By defining only very few data-internal, word-level features and external knowledge sources in the form of word clusters and word embeddings, we train a fast and simple linear classifier', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam LightRel, lahek in hiter klasifikator relacij. Naš cilj je razviti visoko osnovo za različne naloge ekstrakcije odnosov. Z opredelitvijo le malo podatkovnih notranjih, besednih funkcij in zunanjih virov znanja v obliki besednih grozdov in besednih vdelav usposabljamo hiter in preprost linearni klasifikator', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་LightRel དེ་ནི་མགྱོག་ངང་དང་མགྱོག་ངང་རིམ་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཕྱིར་བསྐྲུན་ལས་ཀ་སྦྲེལ་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་མི་འདྲ་བའི་གཞི་རྟེན་ཞིག་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། སྐད་ཆ་clusters་དང་ཐ་སྙད་ནང་གི་གསལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སྟངས་ནི་'}
{'en': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ar': 'OhioState في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: استغلال زيادة البيانات لتصنيف العلاقة في الأوراق العلمية باستخدام الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية المتقطعة', 'pt': 'OhioState em SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Explorando o aumento de dados para classificação de relações em artigos científicos usando redes neurais convolucionais por partes', 'fr': "OHIOstate à SemEval-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Exploiter l'augmentation des données pour la classification des relations dans les articles scientifiques à l'aide de réseaux de neurones convolutifs par morceaux", 'es': 'OhioState en SemEval-2018 Tarea 7: Explotación del aumento de datos para la clasificación de relaciones en artículos científicos mediante redes neuronales convolucionales por partes', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のOhioStateタスク7 ：部分的畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用した科学論文における関係分類のためのデータ拡張の利用', 'zh': '俄亥俄州立大学在SemEval-2018务7:以数益科学论文分段卷积神经网络分类', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 पर OhioState: पीसवाइज कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए डेटा वृद्धि का शोषण', 'ru': 'OhioState на SemEval-2018 Задача 7: Использование увеличения данных для классификации отношений в научных работах с использованием кусочных сверточных нейронных сетей', 'ga': 'OhioState ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Leas a Bhaint as Méadú Sonraí le haghaidh Aicmiú an Chaidrimh i bPáipéir Eolaíocha ag Úsáid Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite Piecewise', 'it': "Ohiostate a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Sfruttare l'aumento dei dati per la classificazione delle relazioni in documenti scientifici utilizzando reti neurali conveluzionali Piecewise", 'ka': 'OhioState semiEval-2018 Task 7: გამოყენება მონაცემების აგგენტიფიკაციის შესახებ კლასიფიკაციაში მონაცემები', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Αξιοποίηση της Διεύρυνσης Δεδομένων για την ταξινόμηση σχέσεων σε επιστημονικές εργασίες με τη χρήση τμηματικών κυριλωδών νευρωνικών δικτύων', 'hu': 'OhioState a SemEval-2018 7. feladat: Adatbővítés hasznosítása a kapcsolatok osztályozására tudományos dolgozatokban Piecewise Convolucionális Neurális Hálózatok használatával', 'lt': '„OhioState“ programos „SemEval-2018“ 7 užduotis. Naudojamas ryšių klasifikavimo moksliniuose dokumentuose, kuriuose naudojami mažmeniniai konvoluciniai neurologiniai tinklai, duomenų didinimas', 'mk': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ms': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7: ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ ആഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d എക്സ്പോട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'kk': 'ОгайоState at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relations Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'mn': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relations Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'pl': 'Zadanie 7: Wykorzystanie rozszerzenia danych do klasyfikacji relacji w pracach naukowych przy użyciu piekowych konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych', 'ro': 'Ohiostate la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 7: Exploatarea măririi datelor pentru clasificarea relațiilor în lucrări științifice folosind rețelele neurale conveluționale piețiale', 'sr': 'OhioState na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: Eksplozicija povećanja podataka za klasifikaciju odnosa u naučnim papirima koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'si': 'Ohiostate at semeval-2018 Job 7: Exploiting Data Agmentation for Association Classication in science papers Using Piecewise ConVoltive neural Netwarks', 'sv': 'OhioState på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Utnyttja dataförstärkning för relationsklassificering i vetenskapliga artiklar med hjälp av Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'mt': 'OhioState f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7: L-isfruttar tal-Aġġustament tad-Dejta għall-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet f’Dokumenti Xjentifiċi li jużaw Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali Piecewise', 'no': 'OhioState at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ur': 'اوہایوسٹیٹ سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 7 میں: سائنس کاپورٹوں میں رابطہ کلاسیفٹ کے لئے ڈاٹ اگنٹمنٹ ڈیٹ اگنٹمنٹ کی استفاده کرنا ہے', 'so': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploting Data Augmentation for Relations Classification in Scientific Papers using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tổ chức tại SemEvl-208 Task 7: phát triển dữ liệu gia tăng liên quan trong các sách khoa học sử dụng các công nghệ hình thái', 'da': 'OhioState på SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Udnyttelse af dataudvidelse til relationsklassificering i videnskabelige papirer ved hjælp af stykkevis konvulutionelle neurale netværk', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Използване на увеличаване на данните за класификация на отношенията в научни статии с помощта на частични конвелуционни неврални мрежи', 'nl': 'OhioState bij SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Gebruik van Data Augmentation voor Relatieclassificatie in Wetenschappelijke Papers met behulp van Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'de': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 7: Nutzung von Daten-Augmentation zur Beziehungsklassifikation in wissenschaftlichen Aufsätzen unter Verwendung von stückweisen Convolutional Neuroral Networks', 'hr': 'OhioState na zadatku 7: Eksploziciranje povećanja podataka za klasifikaciju odnosa u znanstvenim papirima korištenje konvolucionalnih nervnih mreža', 'ko': 'OhioState가SemEval-18임무7: 분단권적신경망을 이용하여 과학논문에서 데이터강화를 이용하여 관계분류', 'id': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'tr': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'fa': 'OhioState at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting data increase for Relations Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'sw': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Kutumia Uungwaji wa Taarifa kwa ajili ya Kuhusiana na Kuhusiana katika Makala ya Sayansi kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Tamko wa Kujitoleza', 'sq': 'OhioState në SemEval-2018 Task 7: Shfrytëzimi i rritjes së të dhënave për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve në dokumentet shkencore duke përdorur rrjetet neuronale konvolutive në pjesë', 'am': 'State at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Network', 'af': 'OhioState by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 7: Verspreiding Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers gebruik Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'az': 'OhioState at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Increasing for Relations Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'bn': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'hy': 'Comment', 'ca': 'OhioState a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'bs': 'OhioState na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: Eksploziciranje povećanja podataka za klasifikaciju odnosa u naučnim papirima koristeći konvolucione neurone mreže', 'cs': 'Úkol 7: Využití rozšíření dat pro klasifikaci vztahů ve vědeckých článcích pomocí kusových konvelučních neuronových sítí', 'fi': 'OhioState SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Tietojen lisäämisen hyödyntäminen suhdeluokittelussa tieteellisissä julkaisuissa käyttäen piecewise konvolutional neural networks', 'et': 'OhioState SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 7: Andmete suurendamise kasutamine seoste klassifitseerimiseks teaduslikes artiklites, kasutades üksikasjalikke konvolutsioonivõrke', 'jv': 'OhjoStat at seminval-2008 task 7: Expojing data AGmentation for Relative klassification in Sayensi Paper Using PriceWise convolution Neral networks', 'sk': 'OhioState na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Izkoriščanje povečanja podatkov za razvrščanje relacij v znanstvenih člankih z uporabo drobnih konvolucijskih živčnih omrežij', 'ha': 'Dakata', 'he': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks', 'bo': 'OhioState at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Data Augmentation for Relation Classification in Scientific Papers Using Piecewise Convolutional Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'We describe our system for SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers where we focus on the Classification task. Our simple piecewise convolution neural encoder performs decently in an end to end manner. A simple inter-task data augmentation significantly boosts the performance of the model. Our best-performing systems stood 8th out of 20 teams on the classification task on noisy data and 12th out of 28 teams on the classification task on clean data.', 'ar': 'نحن نصف نظامنا لمهمة SemEval-2018 المشتركة حول استخراج العلاقات الدلالية وتصنيفها في الأوراق العلمية حيث نركز على مهمة التصنيف. يعمل المشفر العصبي الالتفافي البسيط الخاص بنا بشكل لائق بطريقة شاملة. تعمل الزيادة البسيطة في البيانات بين المهام على تعزيز أداء النموذج بشكل كبير. احتلت أنظمتنا الأفضل أداءً المرتبة الثامنة من بين 20 فريقًا في مهمة التصنيف وفقًا للبيانات الصاخبة والمرتبة 12 من أصل 28 فريقًا في مهمة التصنيف على البيانات النظيفة.', 'es': 'Describimos nuestro sistema para la tarea compartida Semeval-2018 sobre extracción y clasificación de relaciones semánticas en artículos científicos, donde nos centramos en la tarea de clasificación. Nuestro simple codificador neuronal de convolución por partes funciona decentemente de extremo a extremo. Un simple aumento de datos entre tareas aumenta significativamente el rendimiento del modelo. Nuestros sistemas con mejor rendimiento ocuparon el octavo lugar de 20 equipos en la tarea de clasificación con datos ruidosos y el duodécimo de 28 equipos en la tarea de clasificación con datos limpios.', 'pt': 'Descrevemos nosso sistema para a Tarefa Compartilhada SemEval-2018 de Extração e Classificação de Relações Semânticas em Artigos Científicos onde focamos na tarefa de Classificação. Nosso codificador neural de convolução simples por partes funciona decentemente de uma maneira de ponta a ponta. Um simples aumento de dados entre tarefas aumenta significativamente o desempenho do modelo. Nossos sistemas de melhor desempenho ficaram em 8º de 20 equipes na tarefa de classificação em dados ruidosos e 12º de 28 equipes na tarefa de classificação em dados limpos.', 'fr': "Nous décrivons notre système pour la tâche partagée SEMEval-2018 sur l'extraction et la classification des relations sémantiques dans des articles scientifiques où nous nous concentrons sur la tâche de classification. Notre simple encodeur neuronal à convolution par morceaux fonctionne décemment de bout en bout. Une simple augmentation des données entre les tâches améliore considérablement les performances du modèle. Nos systèmes les plus performants se sont classés 8ème sur 20 équipes pour la tâche de classification sur les données bruyantes et 12ème sur 28 équipes pour la tâche de classification sur les données propres.", 'ja': '私たちは、セマンティックリレーション抽出と分類に関するSemEval -2018共有タスクのためのシステムについて科学論文で説明しています。ここでは、分類タスクに焦点を当てています。当社のシンプルな分割畳み込みニューラルエンコーダは、エンドツーエンドできちんと動作します。単純なタスク間データ拡張により、モデルのパフォーマンスが大幅に向上します。当社の最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するシステムは、騒音データの分類タスクで20チーム中8位、クリーンデータの分類タスクで28チーム中12位でした。', 'hi': 'हम SemEval-2018 के लिए हमारी प्रणाली का वर्णन करते हैं वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में शब्दार्थ संबंध निष्कर्षण और वर्गीकरण पर साझा कार्य जहां हम वर्गीकरण कार्य पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हमारे सरल पीसवाइज कनवल्शन न्यूरल एनकोडर अंत से अंत तरीके से शालीनता से प्रदर्शन करता है। एक साधारण अंतर-कार्य डेटा वृद्धि मॉडल के प्रदर्शन को काफी बढ़ा देती है। हमारी सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाली प्रणालियां शोर डेटा पर वर्गीकरण कार्य पर 20 टीमों में से 8 वें स्थान पर थीं और स्वच्छ डेटा पर वर्गीकरण कार्य पर 28 टीमों में से 12 वें स्थान पर थीं।', 'zh': '吾言吾统SemEval-2018取语义于科学论文,专于分职。 简分段卷积神经编码器以端到端。 简任间数增强可以显加模样的性能。 至善统于 20 团队之中排名第 8 ,噪声数之分职, 28 团队之排名第 12 位, 净数之分职。', 'ru': 'Мы описываем нашу систему для SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification в научных работах, где мы фокусируемся на задаче Classification. Наш простой кусочно сверточный нейронный кодер работает прилично в конце к концу. Простое межзадачное увеличение данных значительно повышает производительность модели. Наши лучшие системы занимали 8-е место из 20 команд по классификационной задаче по шумным данным и 12-е место из 28 команд по классификационной задаче по чистым данным.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid cur síos ar ár gcóras le haghaidh Tasc Comhroinnte SemEval-2018 ar Eastóscadh agus Aicmiú Gaol Séimeantach i bPáipéir Eolaíoch ina ndírímid ar an tasc Aicmithe. Feidhmíonn ár n-ionchódóir néaránach convolution píosa simplí go maith ar bhealach ceann go ceann. Treisíonn méadú simplí sonraí idir tascanna go mór feidhmíocht na samhla. Bhí ár gcórais is fearr feidhmíochta san 8ú háit as 20 foireann ar an tasc aicmithe ar shonraí callánacha agus sa 12ú háit as 28 foireann ar an tasc aicmithe ar shonraí glana.', 'hu': 'A SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification tudományos tanulmányokban ismertetjük rendszerünket, ahol az osztályozási feladatra összpontosítunk. Az egyszerű aprólékos konzolúciós idegkódolónk tisztességesen működik, végtől végig. Egy egyszerű feladatközi adatbővítés jelentősen növeli a modell teljesítményét. A legjobb teljesítményű rendszereink a 20 csapat közül 8. helyen álltak a zajos adatok osztályozásában, a 28 csapat közül 12. helyen a tiszta adatok osztályozásában.', 'el': 'Περιγράφουμε το σύστημά μας για την Κοινή Εργασία για την Εξόρυξη και Ταξινόμηση Σημματικών Σχέσεων σε Επιστημονικά Έργα όπου εστιάζουμε στην εργασία Ταξινόμηση. Ο απλός νευρικός κωδικοποιητής συστολής κομματικά λειτουργεί αξιοπρεπώς με τρόπο τέλους σε τέλους. Μια απλή αύξηση δεδομένων μεταξύ εργασιών αυξάνει σημαντικά την απόδοση του μοντέλου. Τα συστήματα μας με τις καλύτερες επιδόσεις στάθηκαν 8η στις είκοσι ομάδες στην εργασία ταξινόμησης σε θορυβώδη δεδομένα και 12η στις 28 ομάδες στην εργασία ταξινόμησης σε καθαρά δεδομένα.', 'it': 'Descriviamo il nostro sistema per SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers dove ci concentriamo sul compito di Classificazione. Il nostro semplice codificatore neurale a convoluzione parziale funziona decentemente in modo end to end. Un semplice aumento dei dati inter-task aumenta significativamente le prestazioni del modello. I nostri sistemi più performanti sono stati 8° su 20 squadre nel compito di classificazione su dati rumorosi e 12° su 28 squadre nel compito di classificazione su dati puliti.', 'kk': 'Біз біз біздің жүйемізді біртінші-2018 жылдамдық бөлікті тапсырманы біртінші қатынас тарқату және ғылыми құжаттардың классификациясының көмегімен біз классификациялау тапсырмас Қарапайым бөлшектеріміздің невралдық кодеріміз аяқтау тәртібімен жақсы жұмыс істейді. Қарапайым тапсырмалардың деректерін көбейту үлгісін көбейту үлгісін көбейту. Біздің ең жақсы жүйелік жүйелеріміз 20 топтардан 8-ші тапсырмасында дыбыс деректері және 28 топтардан 12-ші тапсырмасы тазалау тапсырмасында болды.', 'mk': 'Го опишуваме нашиот систем за SemEval-2018 Соделена задача за екстракција и класификација на семантичките односи во научните документи каде што се фокусираме на задачата за класификација. Нашиот едноставен нервен кодер за конволуција на делови функционира пристојно на крај до крај. A simple inter-task data augmentation significantly boosts the performance of the model.  Нашите најдобри системи беа на осмиот од 20 тимови на класификациската задача за шумни податоци и на 12 од 28 тимови на класификациската задача за чисти податоци.', 'ms': 'Kami menggambarkan sistem kami untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas Berkongsi tentang Ekstraksi Hubungan Semantik dan Klasifikasi dalam Dokumen Saintifik di mana kami fokus pada tugas Klasifikasi. Pengekod saraf konvolusi sederhana kita berjalan dengan baik. Peningkatan data antar-tugas mudah meningkatkan prestasi model secara signifikan. Sistem terbaik kami berdiri ke-8 daripada 20 pasukan dalam tugas klasifikasi pada data bunyi dan ke-12 daripada 28 pasukan dalam tugas klasifikasi pada data bersih.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ SemEval-2018-ის საზოგადოებული დავალების სისტემის გამოსახულება Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers, სადაც ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციის დავალებისთვის კონუკურებთ. ჩვენი განვითარებული კონტულუციის ნეიროლური კოდერები სწორედ გავაკეთებს საკუთარი გადასრულებაში. მარტივი სამუშაო სამუშაო მონაცემები მონაცემების აზექტირება მნიშვნელოვანია მოდელის გამოსახულებას. ნაქთრვ ნაი-ეჲბპთ ოპაგთრვლნთ ჟთჟრვმთ ჟრანა 8-რთ ჲრ 20 რთოა ნა კლაჟთტთკაუთჲნაუთწრა ჱა კლაჟთტთკაუთწუთწრა ნა ბსქთრვ ეანაუთ თ 12-რთ ჲრ 28 რთოა ნა კლაჟთტ', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെയും ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷനേഷന്\u200d പേപ്പറുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്ക നമ്മുടെ എളുപ്പമുള്ള സ്വതന്ത്രത്തിലുള്ള പ്രവർത്തിക്കുന്ന പുരുതൽ കോഡെര്\u200d അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതി A simple inter-task data augmentation significantly boosts the performance of the model.  ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 20 ടീമില്\u200d എട്ടാം ടീമുകള്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുകയായിരുന്നു. ശബ്ദം ഡേറ്റായിട്ട്', 'mt': 'Aħna niddeskrivu s-sistema tagħna għas-SemEval-2018 Kompitu Konġunt dwar l-Estrazzjoni u l-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet Semantiċi fid-Dokumenti Xjentifiċi fejn niffokaw fuq il-kompitu tal-Klassifikazzjoni. L-ikkodifikatur newrali ta’ konvoluzzjoni sempliċi tagħna b’mod biċċiet iwettaq b’mod deċenti fi tmiem għal ieħor. A simple inter-task data augmentation significantly boosts the performance of the model.  Is-sistemi tagħna bl-aħjar prestazzjoni kienu t-tmien minn kull 20 tim dwar il-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni dwar dejta storbjuża u t-tnax minn kull 28 tim dwar il-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni dwar dejta nadifa.', 'no': 'Vi beskriver systemet vårt for semiEval-2018 delt oppgåve om semiantisk relasjonsekstrahering og klassifisering i vitenskapelige papir der vi fokuserer på klassifikasjonen. Vårt enkelt konvolusjonsk neuralkoder utfører på ein slutt til slutt. Ein enkel oppgåvedata- økning styrer utviklinga av modellen. Det beste utføringssystemet våre var 8. av 20 grupper på klassifikasjonen på støydata og 12. av 28 grupper på klassifikasjonen på reine data.', 'pl': 'Opisujemy nasz system dla SemEval-2018 Shared Task na temat ekstrakcji i klasyfikacji relacji semantycznych w pracach naukowych, w których skupiamy się na zadaniu klasyfikacji. Nasz prosty, kawałkowy koder neuronowy działa przyzwoicie w sposób od końca do końca. Proste powiększenie danych między zadaniami znacząco zwiększa wydajność modelu. Nasze najlepiej wydajne systemy stały się ósmej na dwudziestu zespołów podczas klasyfikacji danych hałaśliwych, a dwunastej na 28-ciu zespołów klasyfikacji na czystych danych.', 'lt': 'Mes apibūdiname savo sistemą, skirtą 2018 m. pusevaliui bendrai užduotims dėl semestinių santykių ekstrahavimo ir klasifikavimo moksliniuose dokumentuose, kur daugiausia dėmesio skiriame klasifikavimo užduotims. Mūsų paprastas kvartalų konvoliucinis nervų kodas gerai veikia pabaigoje. Paprastas užduočių tarpusavio duomenų didinimas gerokai padidina modelio veiksmingumą. Mūsų geriausiai veikiančios sistemos sudarė 8-ąją iš 20 komandų klasifikavimo užduotyje triukšmingų duomenų srityje ir 12-ąją iš 28 komandų klasifikavimo užduotyje švarių duomenų srityje.', 'sr': 'Opišemo naš sistem zajedničkog zadatka za pola Eval-2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa u naučnim papirima gde se fokusiramo na zadatak klasifikacije. Naš jednostavan konvolucioni neuralni koder obavlja pristojno na kraju do kraja načina. Jednostavno povećanje podataka međuzadatka značajno povećava izvođenje modela. Naši najbolji izvodnji sustavi stajali su 8. od 20 tima na klasifikacijskom zadatku o bukovim podacima i 12. od 28 tima na klasifikacijskom zadatku o čistim podacima.', 'si': 'අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය සම්වේල්-2018 සාමාන්තික සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතිකරණය සහ විද්\u200dයාත්මක පත්තිකරණය සඳහා සාමාන්තික සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200d අපේ සාධාරණ පිස්සු පිස්සු සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයුරෝල් කෝඩාර් එකක් අවසාන විදියට අවසානය කරනවා. සාධාරණ අන්තර්ජාත්මක දත්ත විශාලනය විශේෂයෙන් මොඩේල්ගේ වැඩේ වැඩ කරනවා. අපේ හොඳම පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය 8වෙනි කණ්ඩායම් 20 වලින් සිද්ධ විශ්වාස කරුණාවක් විතරයි. සිද්ධ දත්ත වලින් පද්ධතියේ', 'so': 'Waxaynu qoraynaa nidaamka SemEval-2018 oo lagu sharciyey shaqada Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification of Scientific Papers where aynu focus on the task of Classification. Qodexdayaga naxaasta ah oo fudud ayaa si fiican u sameeya ugu dambaysta. Horumarinta macluumaadka shaqada oo fudud ayaa si weyn u kordhiya sameynta modellka. nidaamkayaga ugu wanaagsan ee lagu sameynayo waxaa istaagay 20 koox ka mid ah 8aad oo ku saabsan shaqada fasaxa oo ku saabsan data qaylada iyo 28 koox ka mid ah 12aad oo ku saabsan fasaxa macluumaadka nadiifsan.', 'sv': 'Vi beskriver vårt system för SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification i vetenskapliga artiklar där vi fokuserar på klassificeringsuppgiften. Vår enkla styckvis konvulution neural encoder fungerar anständigt på ett slut till slut sätt. En enkel dataökning mellan uppgifter ökar prestandan avsevärt. Våra bäst presterande system stod 8:e av 20 lag i klassificeringsuppgiften för bullriga data och 12:e av 28 lag i klassificeringsuppgiften för rena data.', 'ta': 'SemEval-2018க்கான எங்கள் அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறோம் அறிவியல் தாள்களில் நாம் வகைப்படுத்தல் செமாண்டிக் தொடர்பு வெளியீடு மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல எங்கள் எளிய முடிவு முடிவில் செயல்படுகிறது. Name எங்கள் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் அமைப்புகள் 20 குழுக்களில் 8வது வகுப்பு பணியில் இருந்தது சப்தமான தகவல் மீது மற்றும் 28 குழுக்களில் 12வது சு', 'mn': 'Бид semiEval-2018-ийн Semantic Relations Extraction, Classification in Scientific Papers-ийн SemEval-ийн хуваалтын ажлын системийг тайлбарлаж өгдөг. Бидний энгийн хэмжээний мэдрэлийн шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухаан төгсгөлд сайн ажилладаг. Энгийн интерфейс өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт загварын ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бидний хамгийн сайн үйлдвэрлэлтийн систем 20 багийн 8-аар баг нь чимээгүй өгөгдлийн хуваалтын ажил дээр байлаа. 28 багийн 12-аар нь цэвэр өгөгдлийн хуваалтын ажил дээр байлаа.', 'ur': 'ہم سائنسی کاغذوں میں سیم Eval-2018 کے شریک ٹاکس کے لئے سیمنٹی رابطہ اخراج اور کلاسیفٹ کے ذریعے اپنے سیستم کو توصیح دیتے ہیں جہاں ہم کلاسیفٹ کے کام پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں. ہمارا سادھا نئورل کوڈر اچھے طریقے سے کام کرتا ہے۔ ایک ساده بیٹر-ٹاکس ڈیٹا اضافہ مدل کی عمدگی کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے بہترین عمل کرنے والے سیسٹم 20 ٹیموں میں سے 8مین ٹیموں پر آواز ڈیٹا اور 12مین ٹیموں میں سے 28 ٹیموں میں سے پاکیزہ ڈیٹا کے بارے میں کلکسیونیک ٹیموں پر ہے۔', 'ro': 'Descriem sistemul nostru pentru Sarcina comună SemEval-2018 privind extragerea relațiilor semantice și clasificarea în lucrări științifice, unde ne concentrăm pe sarcina de clasificare. Codorul nostru neural simplu cu convoluţie pieţială funcţionează decent într-o manieră de la capăt la capăt. O simplă mărire a datelor inter-sarcini sporește semnificativ performanța modelului. Sistemele noastre cele mai performante au fost pe locul 8 din 20 de echipe în sarcina de clasificare a datelor zgomotoase și pe locul 12 din 28 de echipe în sarcina de clasificare a datelor curate.', 'uz': "Biz SemEval-2018ning tizimimizni qisqaramiz, ilmiy Paperlarda Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification Vazifani birlashtiramiz. Bu yerda biz sinfning vazifasini foydalanamiz. Bizning oddiy muvaffaqiyatli nazar kodlash qoidalarimiz oxiriga juda yaxshi ishlaydi. A simple inter-task data augmentation significantly boosts the performance of the model.  Bizning eng eng yaxshi bajarish tizimlarimiz 20 guruhdan 8 guruhdan tashkilotga o'xshash bo'lgan shaxsiy sovur maʼlumotlarda, 28 guruhdagi 12 guruhdan saqlash vazifasi bilan boshlanadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống giao dịch của chúng tôi về Phân chia của SemEvol-2008 về chiết xuất và phân bổ giao hưởng từ các giấy khoa học nơi chúng tôi tập trung vào nhiệm vụ phân hạng. Đơn giản là hộp mã hóa thần kinh đơn giản hoạt động một cách tử tế và kết thúc mọi việc. Một cách giảm giác đơn giản trong nhiệm vụ này có thể tăng khả năng của một cách. Những hệ thống có hiệu quả tốt nhất đã xuất hiện 87m trong nhiệm vụ phân loại các dữ liệu ồn ào và 12th ngoài 28 về nhiệm vụ phân loại các dữ liệu sạch.', 'da': 'Vi beskriver vores system til SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification i Scientific Papers, hvor vi fokuserer på klassifikationsopgaven. Vores enkle stykkevis konvulution neurale encoder udfører anstændigt på en end til end måde. En simpel dataforøgelse mellem opgaver øger modellernes ydeevne betydeligt. Vores bedst ydende systemer stod 8. ud af 20 hold på klassificeringsopgaven på støjende data og 12. ud af 28 hold på klassificeringsopgaven på rene data.', 'nl': 'We beschrijven ons systeem voor SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers waar we ons richten op de Classificatie Task. Onze eenvoudige stukwijze convolutie neurale encoder presteert fatsoenlijk in een end to end manier. Een eenvoudige gegevensuitbreiding tussen taken verhoogt de prestaties van het model aanzienlijk. Onze best presterende systemen stonden op de achtste van de 20-teams op het gebied van de classificatietaak op lawaaierige gegevens en de 12e van de 28-teams op het gebied van de classificatietaak op schone gegevens.', 'hr': 'Opišemo naš sustav za pola Evala-2018. zajednički zadatak o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa u znanstvenim papirima gdje se fokusiramo na zadatak klasifikacije. Naš jednostavan konvolucioni neuralni koder radi pristojno na kraju kraja. Jednostavna povećanja podataka međuzadatka značajno povećava učinkovitost modela. Naši najbolji izvodnji sustavi stajali su 8. od 20 tima na klasifikacijskom zadatku o bukovim podacima i 12. od 28 tima na klasifikacijskom zadatku o čistim podacima.', 'bg': 'Описваме нашата система за споделена задача по извличане и класификация на семантични взаимоотношения в научни статии, където се фокусираме върху задачата Класификация. Нашият прост конволюционен невронен кодер работи прилично от край до край. Едно просто увеличение на данните между задачите значително повишава производителността на модела. Нашите най-добре представящи системи бяха 8-ми от 20 екипа по класификацията на шумните данни и 12-ти от 28 екипа по класификацията на чистите данни.', 'de': 'Wir beschreiben unser System für SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers, in denen wir uns auf die Klassifikationsaufgabe konzentrieren. Unser einfacher stückweiser Faltungs-Neuralencoder arbeitet anständig in einer End-to-End-Weise. Eine einfache Intertask-Datenauswertung steigert die Performance des Modells deutlich. Unsere leistungsstärksten Systeme standen acht von 20-Teams bei der Klassifikationsaufgabe auf lauten Daten und zwölf von 28-Teams bei der Klassifikationsaufgabe auf sauberen Daten.', 'ko': '우리는 과학 논문에서SemEval-18의 의미 관계 추출과 분류 공유 임무를 묘사하는 시스템을 묘사했고 주로 분류 임무에 주목했다.우리의 간단한 세그먼트 볼륨 신경 인코더는 끝에서 끝까지 잘 작동한다.간단한 작업 간 데이터 확장은 모델의 성능을 현저하게 향상시킬 수 있다.소음 데이터 분류 임무를 수행한 20개 팀 중 우리가 가장 잘한 시스템은 8위, 청결 데이터 분류 임무를 수행한 28개 팀 중 12위였다.', 'sw': 'Tunaelezea mfumo wetu wa SemEval-2018 kwa ajili ya kushirikiana na jukumu la kutengeneza mahusiano ya kijinsia na Kutangaza kwa Makala ya Sayansi ambapo tunajikita kwenye jukumu la Makala. Kodi yetu ya ubongo wa mapinduzi rahisi inafanya vizuri kwa mwisho wa namna ya mwisho. A simple inter-task data augmentation significantly boosts the performance of the model.  Mifumo yetu bora ya kufanya kazi ilisimama na timu 8 kati ya timu 20 kuhusu kazi ya kutangaza takwimu za kelele na timu 12 kati ya timu 28 kuhusu kazi ya usambazaji kuhusu data safi.', 'id': 'Kami menggambarkan sistem kami untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas Berkongsi tentang Ekstraksi Hubungan Semantik dan Klasifikasi dalam Dokumen Sains di mana kami fokus pada Tugas Klasifikasi. Pengkode saraf konvolusi sederhana kita berjalan dengan baik dari akhir ke akhir. Sebuah peningkatan data antar tugas sederhana meningkatkan prestasi model. Our best-performing systems stood 8th out of 20 teams on the classification task on noisy data and 12th out of 28 teams on the classification task on clean data.', 'af': "Ons beskryf ons stelsel vir SemEval-2018 deelde taak op Semantiese Relasie-uittrekking en Klassifikasie in Wetenskaplike Papiere waar ons fokus op die Klassifikasie-taak. Ons eenvoudige piecewise konvolusie neurale enkoder doen regtig in 'n einde om te eindig. Name Ons beste uitvoerde stelsels staan 8de uit 20 teams op die klassifikasie taak op geluide data en 12de uit 28 teams op die klassifikasie taak op skoon data.", 'fa': 'ما سیستم\u200cمون را برای کار مشترک در نیمه\u200cسال-۲۰۱۸ در مورد اخراج و کلاسیک رابطه\u200cهای بین\u200cالمنتیکی در روزنامه\u200cهای علمی توصیف می\u200cکنیم که ما روی کار شناسایی تمرکز می\u200cکنیم. کودهر عصبی ساده\u200cای ما در پایان به پایان انجام می\u200cدهد. یک افزایش داده\u200cهای بین\u200cکار ساده\u200cای معمولاً عملکرد مدل را افزایش می\u200cدهد. بهترین سیستم\u200cهای اجرای ما از ۲۰ تیم\u200cها در مورد دسته\u200cهای مختصری اطلاعات صوتی و دوازدهم از ۲۸ تیم\u200cها در مورد دسته\u200cهای مختصری اطلاعات پاک بود.', 'tr': 'SemEval-2018 we Semantik Baglanyşyk Extraction we Ilmi Gazetelerde Semantik Baglanyşyk Görevimizi Taýýarlaýarys Bizim basit şekilde bilinçli konvolusyon nöral kodlayıcımız sonuçta iyi bir şekilde işledi. Basit bir öňeşim maglumaty bejermek modiniň eserini örän köpeleştirir. Iň gowy eden sistemamyz 20 topardan 8-nji ýylda sesli maglumatlarda we 28 topardan 12-nji ýylda temiz maglumatlarda klasifikasyon görevi bardy.', 'am': 'የSemEval-2018 ስራችንን በሳይንሳዊ ወረቀቶች ላይ ማውጣት እና መግለጫ እና በሳይንሳዊ ወረቀቶች ላይ በማጠቃለያ ላይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ቀላል አዋቂዎች የሆኑት የነጥብ አካባቢ የሆኑት አካባቢ የፍጻሜ ፍጻሜ በመጨረሻ በመልካም ይሠራል፡፡ A simple inter-task data augmentation significantly boosts the performance of the model.  ከ20 የክፍለ ሥርዓታችን ስርዓት ውስጥ የድምፅ አዳራዎችን ለመለየት ስርዓታችን ስምንተኛው ቆመው ነበር፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր համակարգը "Սեմատիկ հարաբերությունների արտահանման և դասակարգման" 2018 թվականին, որտեղ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք դասակարգման խնդրի վրա: Մեր պարզ նյարդային կոդավորումը հատվածի առումով հարմար է աշխատում վերջում-վերջում: Պարզ միջառաջադրանքների տվյալների աճը նշանակալի բարձրացնում է մոդելի արդյունքը: Մեր լավագույն համակարգերը կազմում էին աղմկոտ տվյալների դասակարգման առաջադրանքների 8-րդ մասը, իսկ 28-րդ մասը\' մաքուր տվյալների դասակարգման առաջադրանքների 12-րդը:', 'sq': 'Ne përshkruajmë sistemin tonë për SemEval-2018 Detyrën e Përbashkët mbi Extraktimin dhe Klasifikimin e Marrëdhënieve Semantike në Dokumentet Shkencësore ku përqëndrohemi në detyrën e Klasifikimit. Koduesi ynë i thjeshtë i konvolucionit në pjesë neuronal funksionon mirë në një mënyrë të fundit. Një rritje e thjeshtë e të dhënave ndër detyrat rrit ndjeshëm performancën e modelit. Sistemet tona më të mirë me rezultate qëndruan të tetën nga 20 ekipe në detyrën e klasifikimit të të dhënave të zhurmshme dhe të 12 nga 28 ekipe në detyrën e klasifikimit të të dhënave të pastra.', 'bs': 'Opišemo naš sistem za zajednički zadatak za pola Eval-2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa u znanstvenim papirima gdje se fokusiramo na zadatak klasifikacije. Naš jednostavan konvolucioni neuralni koder radi pristojno na kraju do kraja načina. Jednostavna povećanja podataka međuzadatka značajno povećava učinkovitost modela. Naši najbolji izvodnji sustavi stajali su 8. od 20 tima na klasifikacijskom zadatku o bukovim podacima i 12. od 28 tima na klasifikacijskom zadatku o čistim podacima.', 'ca': "Descrivem el nostre sistema de SemEval-2018 Task Shared on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers on ens concentrem en la tasca de Classification. El nostre codificador neural de convolució en trossos funciona de manera decent d'un final a un altre. Un simple augment de dades entre tasques augmenta significativament el rendiment del model. Els nostres sistemes millors funcionaven en 8è de cada 20 equips en la tasca de classificació de dades sorolloses i 12è de cada 28 equips en la tasca de classificació de dades netes.", 'bn': 'আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৮-এর জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেমের বর্ণনা করছি সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক বিজ্ঞান পত্রিকাগুলোতে সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক বিদেশ এবং বিভ আমাদের সাধারণ পুরোপুরি নিউরেল এনকোডার শেষ পর্যন্ত ভালোভাবে কাজ করে। একটি সহজ inter-কাজের তথ্য যোগ করা মোডেলের প্রদর্শনের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বাড়িয়ে দেয়। আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনী সিস্টেম শুধু পরিষ্কার তথ্য নিয়ে আওয়াজ ডাটা নিয়ে গ্রাফিকেশন কাজে ৮ টি দলের মধ্যে দাঁড়িয়েছিল।', 'az': 'Biz semi-Eval-2018 paylaŇüńĪlmńĪŇü iŇüimizin sistemini, Semantik ńįliŇükil…ôr √áńĪqarmasńĪ v…ô Klasifikasyon iŇüin …ô odaqlandńĪńüńĪmńĪz Bilim Gazetel…ôrd…ô t…ôsdiql…ôyirik. Bizim basit par√ßalńĪ konvolusyon n√∂ral kodlayńĪcńĪmńĪz sona q…ôd…ôr yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôr edir. Basit inter-task veril…ôr artńĪrmasńĪ modelinin performansńĪnńĪ artńĪrar. Bizim …ôn yaxŇüńĪ …ôm…ôll…ôrimiz sisteml…ôrimiz t…ômiz m…ôlumatlar bar…ôsind…ô s…ôsl m…ôlumatlar bar…ôsind…ô 20 d…ôst…ôd…ôn 8-ci d…ôst…ôd…ôn v…ô 12-ci d…ôst…ôd…ôn 28 d…ôst…ôd…ôn t…ômiz m…ôlumatlar bar…ôsind…ô klasifikasiya g√∂revi bar…ôsind…ô duruldu.', 'cs': 'Náš systém pro SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification popisujeme ve vědeckých článcích, kde se zaměřujeme na klasifikační úlohu. Náš jednoduchý částečně konvoluční neuronový kodér funguje slušně od konce do konce. Jednoduché rozšíření dat mezi úkoly výrazně zvyšuje výkon modelu. Naše nejlepší systémy stály osmým z dvaceti týmů při klasifikaci na hlučných datech a dvanáctým z 28-ti týmů na klasifikaci na čistých datech.', 'et': 'Kirjeldame oma SemEval-2018 ühise ülesande süsteemi semantiliste suhete ekstraheerimise ja klassifitseerimise kohta teaduslikes artiklites, kus keskendume klassifitseerimisülesandele. Meie lihtne tükikese konvolutsiooni neurokodeerija toimib korralikult lõpust lõpuni. Lihtne ülesannetevaheline andmete suurendamine suurendab oluliselt mudeli jõudlust. Meie parimad süsteemid olid mürakate andmete klassifitseerimise ülesandel kaheksas meeskonnast ja puhaste andmete klassifitseerimise ülesandel kaheksas meeskonnas 28 meeskonnast kaheksas.', 'fi': 'Kuvaamme SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers -järjestelmän, jossa keskitymme luokittelutehtävään. Yksinkertainen konvoluutioneurokooderimme toimii kunnollisesti päästä päähän -tavalla. Yksinkertainen tehtävien välinen datan lisääminen parantaa merkittävästi mallin suorituskykyä. Parhaiten suoriutuneet järjestelmämme sijoittuivat meluisan datan luokitustehtävässä kahdeksanneksi 20 tiimistä ja puhtaan datan luokitustehtävässä 12 tiimistä 28 tiimistä.', 'jv': 'We rambarang sistem kanggo seminval-2008 shared task mung semanti Relation extration lan kelas in Sayenskaper Ndheke sampeyan pirang-sampeyan ngerasakno dadi, dadi. Simple inter-task data raise Sistem-sistem sing paling-perusahaan dhéwé wis asai tanggal 8-uwong ning awak dhéwé sing perusahaan karo data sing diranggawe lan 12-uwong sing katwek tanggal 18-uwong, dadi sing diranggawe barang dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Opisujemo naš sistem za SemEval-2018 Shared Task on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification v znanstvenih člankih, kjer se osredotočamo na nalogo Klasifikacije. Naš preprost konvolucijski nevronski kodirnik deluje dostojno od konca do konca. Preprosto povečanje podatkov med nalogami bistveno poveča zmogljivost modela. Naši najbolj uspešni sistemi so bili 8 od 20 ekip pri klasifikaciji hrupnih podatkov in 12 od 28 ekip pri klasifikaciji čistih podatkov.', 'ha': "Kana bayyana aikin mu na SemEL-2018 Kodkoden kodi na kwamfyuta mai saukarwa na danganta, yana aiki mai kyau zuwa ƙarami. An ƙara ɗayan data na cikin aikin mai sauri mai girma yana ƙara aikin motsi. Tsarinmu da mafi kyãwon aikin ƙwarai na tsaye 8th daga jama'a 20 kan mai classifar aiki a kan data na sauya da 12 daga jama'a 28 kan aikin classified kan data tsarkakakku.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མ་ལག་ནི་SemEval-2018 Shared Task རྩིས་ཐོག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཚན་རིག ང་ཚོའི་སྟབས་བདེ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་འཇུག་ནི་མཐའ་མཇུག་བསྡད་པ་ཡིན། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ལས་འགན་འགྲེལ་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་ནི་མིག་ཆགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྟངས་མངོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གྲངས་ལས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་༢༠་ལས་གནད་གཤིས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ནང་ལས་ འགྱུར་བརྡན་སྐྱོན་བྱས་ཆོག་ལས་ར', 'he': 'אנחנו מתארים את המערכת שלנו למשימה משותפת של SemEval-2018 על מחלקת יחסים סמנטיים וקlassifikaציה במסמכים מדעיים Our simple piecewise convolution neural encoder performs decently in an end to end manner.  שיעור נתונים בין משימות פשוט מגביר באופן משמעותי את ההופעה של המודל. המערכות הטובות ביותר שלנו עמדו ב-8 מתוך 20 קבוצות במשימת ההקלטה על נתונים רעשים ו-12 מתוך 28 קבוצות במשימת ההקלטה על נתונים נקיים.'}
{'en': 'UC3M-NII Team at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Semantic Relation Classification in Scientific Papers via Convolutional Neural Network', 'ar': 'فريق UC3M-NII في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: تصنيف العلاقات الدلالية في الأوراق العلمية عبر الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية', 'es': 'Equipo de la UC3M-NII en SemEval-2018 Tarea 7: Clasificación de relaciones semánticas en artículos científicos a través de una red neuronal convolucional', 'fr': "L'équipe UC3M-NII à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Classification des relations sémantiques dans les articles scientifiques via un réseau de neurones convolutifs", 'pt': 'Equipe UC3M-NII no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Classificação de Relação Semântica em Artigos Científicos via Rede Neural Convolucional', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のUC 3 M - NIIチームタスク7 ：畳み込みニューラルネットワークを介した科学論文における意味関係分類', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018任7者UC3M-NII团队:以卷积神经网络科学论文语义类也', 'ru': 'Команда UC3M-NII на SemEval-2018 Задача 7: Классификация семантических отношений в научных работах через сверточную нейронную сеть', 'hi': 'UC3M-NII टीम SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 में: Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के माध्यम से वैज्ञानिक कागजात में शब्दार्थ संबंध वर्गीकरण', 'ga': 'Foireann UC3M-NII ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Aicmiú an Chaidrimh Shéimeantaigh i bPáipéir Eolaíoch tríd an Líonra Néarach Comhtháite', 'el': 'Ομάδα στο έργο 7: Ταξινόμηση Σημματικών Σχέσεων σε Επιστημονικά Έργα μέσω του Νευρικού Δικτύου', 'it': 'Team UC3M-NII a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classificazione della relazione semantica in articoli scientifici tramite rete neurale convoluzionale', 'kk': 'UC3M- NII тобы 7. тапсырманың semiEval- 2018 тапсырмасында: ғылым құжаттардың семантикалық қатынас классификациясы Қосымшалық нейралық желі арқылы', 'hu': 'UC3M-NII Team at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Szemantikus viszonyok osztályozása tudományos dolgozatokban konvolúciós ideghálózaton keresztül', 'lt': 'UC3M-NII grupė 2010–2018 m. pusėje 7 užduotis: Semantinių santykių klasifikavimas moksliniuose dokumentuose per konvoliucinį nervų tinklą', 'mk': 'УК3М-НИИ тимот на SemEval-2018 задача 7: Класификација на семантичните односи во научните документи преку конволуционална неурална мрежа', 'ms': 'Pasukan UC3M-NII di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Klasifikasi Hubungan Semantik dalam Kertas Saintifik melalui Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7-ലെ യുസി3M-NII ടീം: ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mt': 'It-Tim UC3M-NII f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7: Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Relazzjonijiet Semantiċi f’Dokumenti Xjentifiċi permezz tan-Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali', 'mn': 'UC3M-NII Баг SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification in Scientific Papers via Convolutional Neural Network', 'no': 'UC3M-NII-gruppe på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 7: Semantisk relasjonsklassifikasjon i vitenskapelige papir via konvolusjonell neiralnettverk', 'ka': 'UC3M', 'pl': 'Zespół UC3M-NII w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 7: Klasyfikacja relacji semantycznych w pracach naukowych za pomocą konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej', 'ro': 'Echipa UC3M-NII la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 7: Clasificarea relațiilor semantice în lucrări științifice prin rețeaua neuronală convoluțională', 'sr': 'UC3M-NII Tim na zadatku 7: Semantička klasifikacija odnosa u naučnim papirima putem konvolucionalne nervne mreže', 'so': 'UC3M-NII Team at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification in Scientific Papers via Convolutional Neural Network', 'sv': 'UC3M-NII Team på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Semantic Relation Classification in Scientific Papers via Convolutional Neural Network', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் UC3M- NII அணி 7: அறிவியல் தாள்களில் செமாண்டிக் தொடர்பு வகைப்படுத்தல் அறிவியல் தாள்களில் தொடர்பு நெயுரல் பிணை', 'si': 'UC3M-NII කණ්ඩායම් සම්වේල්-2018 කාර්ය 7: සෙමැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාත්මක කාර්යාන්ත්\u200dරික පොත්තුවක් විද්\u200dයාත්ම', 'ur': 'UC3M-NII تیم SemEval-2018 ٹاکس 7 میں: سائنسیٹ کاپورٹوں میں سیمنٹی رابطہ کلاسیفی کرنا Convolutional Neural Network کے ذریعہ', 'vi': 'Tập đoàn UC3M-NII tại SemEvl-208 Task 7: Semantic relation classification in Scientific Papers thông qua kênh thần kinh xuyên tâm', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Класификация на семантичните взаимоотношения в научните доклади чрез конвелуционна неврална мрежа', 'hr': 'UC3M-NII tim na zadatku 7. poluvremenog ispitivanja-2018: klasifikacija semantičkih odnosa u znanstvenim papirima putem konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'nl': 'UC3M-NII Team bij SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Semantische Relatieclassificatie in Wetenschappelijke Papers via Convolutional Neural Network', 'da': 'UC3M-NII Team ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Klassificering af semantisk relation i videnskabelige papirer via konvolutivt neuralt netværk', 'de': 'UC3M-NII Team bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 7: Semantische Relationsklassifikation in wissenschaftlichen Arbeiten über Convolutional Neural Network', 'id': 'Tim UC3M-NII di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Klasifikasi Hubungan Semantik dalam Dokumen Sains melalui Jaringan Neural Konvelusional', 'ko': 'UC3M-NII팀이SemEval-18 임무7: 권적신경 네트워크를 통해 과학 논문에서 의미관계 분류', 'fa': 'تیم UC3M-NII در ماموریت نیمه-۲۰۱۸: کلاسیف رابطه\u200cهای سیمانتیک در روزنامه\u200cهای علمی از طریق شبکه عصبی معمولی', 'af': 'UC3M-NII Skep by SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Semantiese Relasie Klassifikasie in Wetenskaplike Papiere deur Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerk', 'sw': 'Timu ya UC3M-NII katika Task 7 ya SemEval-2018: Utoaji wa Kuhusiana na Semantic in Sayansi kwa kupitia Mtandao wa Neurali', 'tr': 'UC3M-NII Team at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification in Scientific Papers via Convolutional Neural Network', 'sq': 'Ekipi UC3M-NII në SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification Semantic Relation in Scientific Papers via Convolutional Neural Network', 'am': 'ስራ 7: Semantic Relation Classification in Scientific Papers via Convolutional Neural Network', 'hy': 'UC3M-N-I թիմը Սեմեվալ-2018-ի 7. հանձնարարությունը. Սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների դասակարգման գիտական փաստաթղթերում հակառակցող նյարդային ցանցի միջոցով', 'az': 'UC3M-NII Takım 7: İlmi Kağıtlar arasında Semantik İlişki Klasifikasyonu Konvolucional Nöral Ağı vasitəsilə', 'bs': 'UC3M-NII Team na zadatku 7. polEval-2018: klasifikacija semantičkih odnosa u naučnim papirima putem konvolucionalne neuronske mreže', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৭: বৈজ্ঞানিক পত্রিকায় সেম্যান্ডিক সম্পর্ক ক্লাসিফেশনের সেম্যান্টিক সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত প্রদান', 'ca': "L'equip UC3M-NII de SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification Semantic Relations in Scientific Papers via Convolutional Neural Network", 'cs': 'Úkol 7: Klasifikace sémantických vztahů ve vědeckých článcích prostřednictvím konveluční neuronové sítě', 'et': 'UC3M-NII meeskond SemEval-2018 ülesanne 7: semantiliste suhete klassifitseerimine teaduslikes artiklites konvolutsioonilise neurovõrgu kaudu', 'fi': 'UC3M-NII-ryhmä SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Semanttisten suhteiden luokittelu tieteellisissä julkaisuissa konvolutional neural Network -verkoston kautta', 'jv': 'U3 M-NII Group at seminval-2008 task 7: semanti Relative CLSSification in Sayensi Paper by convolution Neral Network', 'sk': 'Ekipa UC3M-NII na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Klasifikacija semantičnih odnosov v znanstvenih člankih prek konvolucijske nevronske mreže', 'he': 'צוות UC3M-NII ב SemEval-2018 משימה 7: מערכת יחסים סמנטיות במסמכים מדעיים', 'ha': 'Tafiyar 7: Semantic Relation Classification in Zanistan Gauras through Congolonal Neural Networkspace', 'bo': 'UC3M-NII Team at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification in Scientific Papers via Convolutional Neural Network'}
{'en': 'This paper reports our participation for SemEval-2018 Task 7 on extraction and classification of relationships between entities in scientific papers. Our approach is based on the use of a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) trained on350 abstract with manually annotated entities and relations. Our hypothesis is that this deep learning model can be applied to extract and classify relations between entities for scientific papers at the same time. We use the Part-of-Speech and the distances to the target entities as part of the embedding for each word and we blind all the entities by marker names. In addition, we use sampling techniques to overcome the imbalance issues of this dataset. Our architecture obtained an F1-score of 35.4 % for the relation extraction task and 18.5 % for the relation classification task with a basic configuration of the one step CNN.', 'ar': 'توضح هذه الورقة مشاركتنا في SemEval-2018 Task 7 حول استخراج العلاقات بين الكيانات في الأوراق العلمية وتصنيفها. يعتمد نهجنا على استخدام شبكة عصبية تلافيفية (CNN) مدربة على ملخص 350 مع كيانات وعلاقات مشروحة يدويًا. فرضيتنا هي أنه يمكن تطبيق نموذج التعلم العميق هذا لاستخراج وتصنيف العلاقات بين الكيانات للأوراق العلمية في نفس الوقت. نستخدم جزء الكلام والمسافات إلى الكيانات المستهدفة كجزء من التضمين لكل كلمة ونعمي جميع الكيانات بأسماء العلامات. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نستخدم تقنيات أخذ العينات للتغلب على مشكلات عدم التوازن لمجموعة البيانات هذه. حصلت الهندسة المعمارية الخاصة بنا على درجة F1 بنسبة 35.4٪ لمهمة استخراج العلاقة و 18.5٪ لمهمة تصنيف العلاقة مع التكوين الأساسي لخطوة CNN ذات الخطوة الواحدة.', 'es': 'Este artículo informa de nuestra participación en la Tarea 7 de SemEval-2018 sobre extracción y clasificación de relaciones entre entidades en artículos científicos. Nuestro enfoque se basa en el uso de una red neuronal convolucional (CNN) entrenada en 350 abstractos con entidades y relaciones anotadas manualmente. Nuestra hipótesis es que este modelo de aprendizaje profundo se puede aplicar para extraer y clasificar las relaciones entre entidades para artículos científicos al mismo tiempo. Utilizamos la parte del discurso y las distancias a las entidades objetivo como parte de la incrustación de cada palabra y cegamos a todas las entidades con nombres de marcadores. Además, utilizamos técnicas de muestreo para superar los problemas de desequilibrio de este conjunto de datos. Nuestra arquitectura obtuvo una puntuación F1 del 35,4% para la tarea de extracción de relaciones y del 18,5% para la tarea de clasificación de relaciones con una configuración básica de la CNN de un solo paso.', 'fr': "Cet article rend compte de notre participation à la tâche 7 de SEMEval-2018 sur l'extraction et la classification des relations entre les entités dans les articles scientifiques. Notre approche est basée sur l'utilisation d'un réseau de neurones convolutifs (CNN) formé sur 350 abstracts avec des entités et des relations annotées manuellement. Notre hypothèse est que ce modèle d'apprentissage profond peut être appliqué pour extraire et classer des relations entre des entités pour des articles scientifiques en même temps. Nous utilisons la partie du discours et les distances par rapport aux entités cibles dans le cadre de l'intégration de chaque mot et nous aveuglons toutes les entités par des noms de marqueurs. En outre, nous utilisons des techniques d'échantillonnage pour surmonter les problèmes de déséquilibre de cet ensemble de données. Notre architecture a obtenu un score F1 de 35,4\xa0% pour la tâche d'extraction de relation et de 18,5\xa0% pour la tâche de classification des relations avec une configuration de base du CNN en une étape.", 'pt': 'Este artigo relata nossa participação na Tarefa 7 do SemEval-2018 sobre extração e classificação de relacionamentos entre entidades em artigos científicos. Nossa abordagem é baseada no uso de uma Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN) treinada em 350 resumos com entidades e relações anotadas manualmente. Nossa hipótese é que esse modelo de aprendizado profundo pode ser aplicado para extrair e classificar relações entre entidades para artigos científicos ao mesmo tempo. Usamos a Part-of-Speech e as distâncias para as entidades alvo como parte da incorporação de cada palavra e cegamos todas as entidades pelos nomes dos marcadores. Além disso, usamos técnicas de amostragem para superar os problemas de desequilíbrio desse conjunto de dados. Nossa arquitetura obteve um F1-score de 35,4% para a tarefa de extração de relações e 18,5% para a tarefa de classificação de relações com uma configuração básica da CNN de um passo.', 'ja': '本稿では、科学論文におけるエンティティ間の関係の抽出と分類に関するSemEval -2018タスク7への参加について報告する。当社のアプローチは、手動で注釈付けされたエンティティと関係を持つ抽象的な350についてトレーニングされた畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）の使用に基づいています。私たちの仮説は、このディープラーニングモデルは、同時に科学論文のためのエンティティ間の関係を抽出し、分類するために適用できるというものです。各単語の埋め込みの一部として、発話部分とターゲットエンティティまでの距離を使用し、すべてのエンティティをマーカー名でブラインドします。さらに、サンプリング技術を使用して、このデータセットのアンバランスな問題を克服します。当社のアーキテクチャは、リレーション抽出タスクで35.4%、ワンステップCNNの基本構成を持つリレーション分類タスクで18.5%のF 1スコアを取得しました。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में संस्थाओं के बीच संबंधों के निष्कर्षण और वर्गीकरण पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 के लिए हमारी भागीदारी की रिपोर्ट करता है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट संस्थाओं और संबंधों के साथ 350 सार पर प्रशिक्षित एक Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) के उपयोग पर आधारित है। हमारी परिकल्पना यह है कि इस गहरे सीखने के मॉडल को एक ही समय में वैज्ञानिक कागजात के लिए संस्थाओं के बीच संबंधों को निकालने और वर्गीकृत करने के लिए लागू किया जा सकता है। हम पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच और प्रत्येक शब्द के लिए एम्बेडिंग के हिस्से के रूप में लक्ष्य संस्थाओं की दूरी का उपयोग करते हैं और हम मार्कर नामों से सभी संस्थाओं को अंधा करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम इस डेटासेट के असंतुलन के मुद्दों को दूर करने के लिए नमूना तकनीकों का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारी वास्तुकला ने संबंध निष्कर्षण कार्य के लिए 35.4% का एक F1-स्कोर प्राप्त किया और एक चरण सीएनएन के मूल कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के साथ संबंध वर्गीकरण कार्य के लिए 18.5% प्राप्त किया।', 'zh': '本文以闻SemEval-2018务7者与焉,7及科学论文之实体之类。 吾法基于用卷积神经网络(CNN),宜网络练之于350摘要,有手动注之体。 吾之设也,深学模形,可以兼取类科学论文之体也。 吾以词性及与质相去为单词嵌之一,因名失明。 此外,用采样术以胜此数集者不平。 吾架构得 35.4% 之 F1 ,得 18.5% 之分,置一步 CNN。', 'ru': 'В этой статье сообщается о нашем участии в задаче 7 SemEval-2018 по извлечению и классификации отношений между объектами в научных работах. Наш подход основан на использовании сверточной нейронной сети (CNN), обученной абстрактной модели 350 с вручную аннотированными сущностями и отношениями. Наша гипотеза заключается в том, что эта модель глубокого обучения может быть применена для извлечения и классификации отношений между сущностями для научных работ одновременно. Мы используем часть речи и расстояния до целевых сущностей как часть встраивания для каждого слова, и мы слепим все сущности по именам маркеров. Кроме того, мы используем методы выборки для преодоления проблем дисбаланса в этом наборе данных. Наша архитектура получила оценку F1 35,4% для задачи извлечения отношений и 18,5% для задачи классификации отношений с базовой конфигурацией одношагового CNN.', 'ga': 'Tuairiscíonn an páipéar seo ár rannpháirtíocht do Thasc 7 SemEval-2018 ar eastóscadh agus aicmiú caidreamh idir eintitis i bpáipéir eolaíocha. Tá ár gcur chuige bunaithe ar úsáid a bhaint as Líonra Néarthach Comhdhlúite (CNN) atá oilte ar achomaireacht 350 le heintitis agus caidrimh atá anótáilte de láimh. Is é ár hipitéis gur féidir an tsamhail foghlama domhain seo a chur i bhfeidhm chun caidreamh idir eintitis do pháipéir eolaíocha a bhaint agus a rangú ag an am céanna. Bainimid úsáid as an bPáirt cainte agus as na hachair go dtí na sprioc-eintitis mar chuid de leabú gach focal agus dallaimid gach aonán le hainmneacha marcála. Ina theannta sin, bainimid úsáid as teicnící samplála chun na saincheisteanna éagothroime a bhaineann leis an tacar sonraí seo a shárú. Fuair ár n-ailtireacht scór F1 de 35.4% don tasc asbhainte caidrimh agus 18.5% don tasc aicmithe gaol le cumraíocht bhunúsach den CNN aonchéime.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის შესახებ ჩვენი ნაწილი semiEval-2018 რაოდენობის 7-ზე გამოყენება და კლასიფიკაცია განსხვავებების განსხვავებაზე მეცნიერო დოკუმენტებში. ჩვენი პროგრამის გამოყენება კონტროლუციონალური ნეიროლური ქსელის (CNN) გამოყენებაზე, რომელიც პროგრამიურად აბსტრაქტირებულია 350 აბსტრაქტის გამოყენებ ჩვენი ჰიპოტეზა არის, რომ ეს ძალიან სწავლის მოდელი შეიძლება გამოყენება და კლასიფიკაცია განსხვავებების განმავლობაში მეცნიერო გვერდილებისთვის. ჩვენ ყველა სიტყვების ნაწილი და სიტყვების განტოლებას მინიშვნელოვანი ინტერტიებისთვის გამოყენებთ, როგორც ყველა სიტყვების ნაწილი და ჩვენ ყველა ინტერტიები მარკერის სა დამატებით, ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ გამოყენებული მონაცემების განმავლობის პრობლემების განმავლობა. ჩვენი არქტიქტურა 35.4% სწორედ მიიღეთ შესახებ ექსტრექციის დავალებისთვის და 18.5% სწორედ კლასიფიკაციის დავალებისთვის ერთი კონფიგურაციაზე.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány tudományos tanulmányokban beszámol arról, hogy részt vettünk az entitások közötti kapcsolatok kitermelésével és osztályozásával foglalkozó SemEval-2018 Task 7-ben. Megközelítésünk egy 350 absztrakton képzett Convolucional Neural Network (CNN) használatán alapul, manuálisan jegyzetelt entitásokkal és kapcsolatokkal. Hipotézisünk szerint ez a mélytanulási modell egyszerre alkalmazható az entitások közötti kapcsolatok kivonására és osztályozására tudományos dolgozatokban. Minden szó beágyazásának részeként a beszédrészt és a célentitásoktól való távolságot használjuk, és jelölőnevekkel vakítjuk meg az entitásokat. Ezenkívül mintavételi technikákat alkalmazunk az adatkészlet egyensúlyhiányának problémáinak leküzdésére. Az építészetünk F1 pontszámot kapott 35,4%-os kapcsolatkitermelési feladatra, 18,5%-os kapcsolatosztályozási feladatra az egylépéses CNN alapkonfigurációjával.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία αναφέρει τη συμμετοχή μας στο έργο 7 για την εξαγωγή και ταξινόμηση σχέσεων μεταξύ οντοτήτων σε επιστημονικές εργασίες. Η προσέγγισή μας βασίζεται στη χρήση ενός Κυλιστικού Νευρικού Δικτύου (ΚΝΝ) εκπαιδευμένου σε περίληψη 350 με χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένες οντότητες και σχέσεις. Η υπόθεσή μας είναι ότι αυτό το μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί για την εξαγωγή και την ταξινόμηση σχέσεων μεταξύ οντοτήτων για επιστημονικές εργασίες ταυτόχρονα. Χρησιμοποιούμε το Μέρος του Λόγου και τις αποστάσεις προς τις οντότητες-στόχους ως μέρος της ενσωμάτωσης για κάθε λέξη και τυφλώνουμε όλες τις οντότητες με ονόματα σημάτων. Επιπλέον, χρησιμοποιούμε τεχνικές δειγματοληψίας για να ξεπεράσουμε τα προβλήματα ανισορροπίας αυτού του συνόλου δεδομένων. Η αρχιτεκτονική μας απέκτησε μια βαθμολογία F1 35,4% για την εργασία εξαγωγής σχέσεων και 18,5% για την εργασία ταξινόμησης σχέσεων με μια βασική διαμόρφωση του ενός βήματος CNN.', 'it': "Questo articolo riporta la nostra partecipazione a SemEval-2018 Task 7 sull'estrazione e classificazione delle relazioni tra entità in articoli scientifici. Il nostro approccio si basa sull'utilizzo di una Rete Neurale Convoluzionale (CNN) formata su 350 abstract con entità e relazioni annotate manualmente. La nostra ipotesi è che questo modello di deep learning possa essere applicato per estrarre e classificare le relazioni tra entità per documenti scientifici allo stesso tempo. Usiamo il Part-of-Speech e le distanze dalle entità target come parte dell'incorporamento per ogni parola e accechiamo tutte le entità dai nomi dei marcatori. Inoltre, utilizziamo tecniche di campionamento per superare i problemi di squilibrio di questo set di dati. La nostra architettura ha ottenuto un punteggio F1 del 35,4% per l'attività di estrazione delle relazioni e del 18,5% per l'attività di classificazione delle relazioni con una configurazione base della CNN di un passo.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pranešama apie mūsų dalyvavimą SemEval-2018 7 užduotyje dėl subjektų santykių išgavimo ir klasifikavimo moksliniuose dokumentuose. Mūsų požiūris grindžiamas konvoliucinio neurologinio tinklo (CNN) naudojimu, parengto 350 abstrakte su rankiniu būdu anotuotais subjektais ir santykiais. Our hypothesis is that this deep learning model can be applied to extract and classify relations between entities for scientific papers at the same time.  Mes naudojame kalbos dalį ir atstumus tiksliniams subjektams kaip kiekvieno žodžio įterpimo dalį ir visiems subjektams akliname žymekliais vardais. Be to, mes naudojame mėginių ėmimo metodus, kad įveiktume šio duomenų rinkinio disbalanso klausimus. Mūsų architektūra gavo F1 tašką 35,4 % santykių ekstrahavimo užduotyje ir 18,5 % santykių klasifikavimo užduotyje su pagrindine vieno žingsnio CNN konfigūracija.', 'mk': 'Овој документ известува за нашето учество во SemEval-2018 задача 7 за екстракција и класификација на односите меѓу ентитетите во научните документи. Нашиот пристап е базиран на употребата на конволуционална неврална мрежа (CNN) обучена на 350 апстрактни со рачно анотирани ентитети и односи. Нашата хипотеза е дека овој модел на длабоко учење може да се примени за извлекување и класификација на односите меѓу ентитетите за научни документи во исто време. Ние го користиме делот од говорот и оддалеченоста од целните ентитети како дел од вградувањето за секој збор и ги слепиме сите ентитети со имиња на маркери. Покрај тоа, користиме техники на примероци за надминување на прашањата на нерамнотежата на овој податок. Нашата архитектура доби оценка F1 од 35,4 отсто за задачата за извлекување на односите и 18,5 отсто за задачата за класификација на односите со основна конфигурација на еден чекор CNN.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini melaporkan participasi kita untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 7 mengenai ekstraksi dan klasifikasi hubungan antara entiti dalam kertas saintifik. pendekatan kita berdasarkan penggunaan Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional (CNN) dilatih pada 350 abstrak dengan entiti dan hubungan yang dicatat secara manual. Hipotesis kita adalah bahawa model belajar dalam ini boleh dilaksanakan untuk mengekstrak dan mengklasifikasikan hubungan antara entiti untuk kertas saintifik pada masa yang sama. Kita gunakan Bahagian-Perkataan dan jarak ke entiti sasaran sebagai sebahagian dari penyembedding untuk setiap perkataan dan kita buta semua entiti dengan nama penanda. Selain itu, kami menggunakan teknik pemilihan sampel untuk mengatasi masalah ketidakseimbangan set data ini. Arkitektur kami mendapat skor F1 35.4% untuk tugas ekstraksi hubungan dan 18.5% untuk tugas klasifikasi hubungan dengan konfigurasi asas satu langkah CNN.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің 7- жарым Eval- 2018 тапсырмасының қатынасымызды ғылыми қағаздар арасындағы қатынастарды тарқату және түрлендіру туралы хабарлайды. Біздің тәсіліміміз қолмен белгіленген мәліметтер мен қатынастарымен 350 абстракты жұмыс желінің (CNN) қолдануына негізделген. Біздің гипотезиямыз, бір рет ғылыми қағаздар арасындағы қатынастарды тарқату мен классификациялау үшін қолданылады. Ол сөздің бөлігін және мақсатты бөлігін әрбір сөз үшін ендіру бөлігі ретінде қолданып, барлық бөліктерді маркер атаулары бойынша көтеріп тұрамыз. Қосымша, бұл деректер жиының дибаланстық мәселелерін көтеру үшін мәліметтерді баптау техникаларын қолданамыз. Біздің архитектурамыз тапсырманы тарқату тапсырмасы үшін 35,4% деген F1- нұсқасын алды, сондай-ақ CNN- нің негізгі қадамды баптаулары үшін 18,5% деген тапсырмасы.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jirrapporta l-parteċipazzjoni tagħna għas-SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7 dwar l-estrazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet bejn entitajiet f’dokumenti xjentifiċi. L-approċċ tagħna huwa bbażat fuq l-użu ta’ Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali (CNN) imħarreġ fuq 350 astratt b’entitajiet u relazzjonijiet annotati manwalment. L-ipoteżi tagħna hija li dan il-mudell ta’ tagħlim profond jista’ jiġi applikat biex jiġu estratti u kklassifikati r-relazzjonijiet bejn entitajiet għal dokumenti xjentifiċi fl-istess ħin. Aħna nużaw il-Parti tal-Kellem u d-distanzi lejn l-entitajiet fil-mira bħala parti mill-inkorporazzjoni għal kull kelma u aħna ngħajru lill-entitajiet kollha bl-ismijiet tal-markaturi. Barra minn hekk, aħna nużaw tekniki ta’ teħid ta’ kampjuni biex ngħelbu l-kwistjonijiet ta’ żbilanċ ta’ dan is-sett ta’ dejta. L-arkitettura tagħna kisbet punteġġ F1 ta’ 35.4% għall-kompitu ta’ estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni u 18.5% għall-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjoni b’konfigurazzjoni bażika ta’ pass wieħed CNN.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രത്തിലെ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുകയും ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200d Our approach is based on the use of a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) trained on350 abstract with manually annotated entities and relations.  നമ്മുടെ ഹൈപ്പിറ്റസിസിയാണ് ഈ ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്ക എല്ലാ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും അകത്തേക്കുള്ള അടയാളങ്ങളായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dട്ട് ഓഫ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. അടയാളപ്പെടുത്തുന കൂടാതെ, ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിന്റെ അസാധാരണ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ പരിജയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ടെക്കി നമ്മുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചിട്ടറിക്ക് 35.4% എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d ലഭിച്ചു. ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ജോലിക്കും 18.5% ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലിക്കും ഒരു സിഎന്\u200dഎന', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2018 Task 7-д шинжлэх ухааны бичиг баримтуудын хоорондын харилцааны гаргах, хуваалцах талаар бидний оролцоог тайлбарладаг. Бидний арга барилга нь холбоотой байгууллагууд болон харилцаанд 350 сургалтыг сургалтын Конvolution Neural Network (CNN) ашиглах боломжтой. Бидний таамаглал бол энэ гүн гүнзгий суралцах загвар шинжлэх ухааны бичиг баримтуудын хоорондын харилцааныг хадгалахын тулд ашиглаж болно. Бид илтгэлийн хэсэг болон зай нь зорилготой байгууллагуудын нэг хэсэг гэж ашиглаж, бүх байгууллагуудыг маркер нэртэй харах болно. Үүнээс гадна бид энэ өгөгдлийн сангийн тэгш байдлын асуудлыг дутагдахын тулд шинж тэмдэглэх техникуудыг ашиглаж байна. Бидний архитектур гаргах үйлдлийн харилцааны ажил дээр 35.4% F1 оноо авсан бөгөөд нэг алхам CNN-ын үндсэн загвартай харилцааны ажил дээр 18.5% нь авсан.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă participarea noastră la SemEval-2018 Task 7 privind extragerea și clasificarea relațiilor dintre entități în lucrări științifice. Abordarea noastră se bazează pe utilizarea unei Rețele Neurale Convoluționale (CNN) instruite pe 350 abstract cu entități și relații adnotate manual. Ipoteza noastră este că acest model de învățare profundă poate fi aplicat pentru extragerea și clasificarea relațiilor dintre entități pentru lucrări științifice în același timp. Folosim Part-of-Speech și distanțele până la entitățile țintă ca parte a încorporării pentru fiecare cuvânt și orbim toate entitățile prin nume de marcatori. În plus, folosim tehnici de eșantionare pentru a depăși problemele de dezechilibru ale acestui set de date. Arhitectura noastră a obținut un scor F1 de 35,4% pentru sarcina de extragere a relației și 18,5% pentru sarcina de clasificare a relației cu o configurație de bază a CNN-ului cu un singur pas.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz udział w SemEval-2018 Zadaniu 7 dotyczącym ekstrakcji i klasyfikacji relacji między podmiotami w pracach naukowych. Nasze podejście opiera się na wykorzystaniu Konwolucyjnej Sieci Neuralnej (CNN) przeszkolonej na 350 abstrakcji z ręcznie adnotacyjnymi jednostkami i relacjami. Nasza hipoteza jest taka, że ten model głębokiego uczenia może być stosowany do wyodrębniania i klasyfikowania relacji między jednostkami dla prac naukowych w tym samym czasie. Używamy części mowy i odległości do docelowych jednostek jako części osadzenia dla każdego słowa i oślepiamy wszystkie jednostki nazwami znaczników. Ponadto stosujemy techniki próbkowania, aby przezwyciężyć problemy nierównowagi tego zbioru danych. Nasza architektura uzyskała wynik F1 35,4% dla zadania ekstrakcji relacji oraz 18,5% dla zadania klasyfikacji relacji z podstawową konfiguracją jednostopniowego CNN.', 'no': 'Denne papiret rapporterer vårt deltakast for semiEval-2018 oppgåve 7 om utpakking og klassifisering av forholdet mellom einingar i vitenskapelige papir. Tilnærminga vårt er basert på bruk av ein konvolusjonell neiralnettverk (CNN) trengt on350 abstrakt med manuelt oppmerkte einingar og relasjonar. Vårt hypotese er at denne dyppa læringsmodellen kan brukast for å pakka ut og klassifisera forholdet mellom einingar for vitenskapelige papir samtidig. Vi bruker delen av tale og avstandane til målene som del av innbygginga for kvar ord, og vi blinkar alle entitetene etter merknamn. I tillegg bruker vi prøvemetodar for å overføra ulikhetsproblemene i denne dataset. Arkitekturen vårt fikk eit F1- poeng med 35,4% for forholdet til ekstraksjonsoppgåva og 18,5% for forholdet med ein grunnleggjande oppsett av ein steg CNN.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir prijavljuje naše sudjelovanje za zadatak 7 za pola Evala-2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji odnosa između entitata u naučnim papirima. Naš pristup je baziran na korištenju konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN) obučene na 350 abstrakta sa ruèno annotiranim entitetima i odnosima. Naša hipoteza je da se ovaj model dubokog učenja može primjenjivati za izvlačenje i klasifikaciju odnosa između entiteta za naučne papire u is to vreme. Koristimo deo govora i udaljenosti ciljnim entitetima kao deo integracije za svaku reč i slepimo sve entitete po imenima markera. Osim toga, koristimo tehnike za uzorak uzorka kako bi preuzeli probleme sa nedalansiranjem ovog seta podataka. Naša arhitektura je dobila F1 rezultat od 35,4% za zadatak izvlačenja odnosa i 18,5% za zadatak klasifikacije odnosa sa osnovnom konfiguracijom jednog koraka CNN.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපිත ව අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය අධාරිත වෙන්නේ සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (CNN) ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ අත්පත්ත සම්බන්ධතාවක් සමග අත්පත්ති අපේ විශ්වාස තමයි මේ ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාත්මක පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාත්මක පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධතාවක අපි හැම වචනයක්ම භාවිත කරන්නේ කොටසක් වලින් ඉලක්ෂාත්මක වලින් දුර්වල් වලින් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. අපි හැම වචනයක්ම අවස ඒ වගේම, අපි මේ තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. අපේ ස්ථාපනය සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සඳහා F1-score 35.4% වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සඳහා 18.5% වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සඳහා CNN එක', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu wargeliyaa qayb-gelinta shaqada 7 ee SemEval-2018 ku saabsan soo saarashada iyo kala soocaynta xiriirka ku saabsan warqadaha cilmiga leh. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu waxay ku saleysan tahay isticmaalka shabakadda Neural (CNN) oo lagu tababaray on350 abstract oo ay qofka gacanta ku dhibaataysay iyo xiriirka. Fiiniyadeenu waa in sameynta waxbarashada mool dheer lagu codsan karo in la soo bixiyo xiriir kala duduwan oo loo kala sooco warqadaha sayniska. Waxaynu ugu isticmaalnaa qeybta hadalka iyo meelaha ay leeyihiin waxyaabaha la jeedo sida qeyb ka mid ah hadal kastaba, islamarkaasna waxaynu dhamaan dhamaantood ku indhahaa magaca markhaarada. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu isticmaalnaa qalabka sameynta si aan uga adkayno dhibaatooyinka aan isku qiimo karin sawiradan. Arkitirkayagii wuxuu helay F1-score oo ah 35.4% shaqada la soo bixinayo iyo 18.5% shaqo fasalka la xiriiro oo la sameynayo qaabilaad aasaasi ah ee hal tallaabo CNN.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats redovisar vårt deltagande i SemEval-2018 Task 7 om extraktion och klassificering av relationer mellan entiteter i vetenskapliga artiklar. Vårt tillvägagångssätt bygger på användning av ett konvolutionellt neuralt nätverk (CNN) tränat på 350 abstract med manuellt kommenterade entiteter och relationer. Vår hypotes är att denna djupinlärningsmodell kan tillämpas för att extrahera och klassificera relationer mellan entiteter för vetenskapliga artiklar samtidigt. Vi använder Part-of-Speech och avstånden till målentiteterna som en del av inbäddningen för varje ord och vi blindar alla entiteter med markörer. Dessutom använder vi provtagningstekniker för att övervinna obalansproblemen i denna datauppsättning. Vår arkitektur fick en F1-poäng på 35,4% för relationsextraktionsuppgiften och 18,5% för relationsklassificeringsuppgiften med en grundläggande konfiguration av ett steg CNN.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதம் அறிவியல் தாள்களில் உள்ள பொருட்களுக்கு இடையே உள்ள தொடர்புகளை பிரித்து வகைப்படுத்தும் மற்றும் செம்Eval-2018 பணி  எங்கள் செயல்பாடு கைமுறைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பொருட்கள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகளுடன் தொடர்புகள் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஒரு தொடர்பு வலைப்பின்னல் (CNN)  நம்முடைய hypothesis is that this deep learning model can be applied to extract and classify relations between entities for extract and classified relations at the same time. நாங்கள் ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தைக்கும் உள்ளீட்டின் பகுதியாக பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் நாம் எல்லா பொருட்களையும் குறிப்பு பெயரா மேலும், நாம் மாதிரி தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத்தி இந்த தரவுத்தளத்தின் ஒழுங்குமையில் பிரச்சனைகள Our architecture obtained an F1-score of 35.4% for the relation extraction task and 18.5% for the relation classification task with a basic configuration of the one step CNN.', 'ur': 'This paper reports our participation for SemEval-2018 Task 7 on extraction and classification of relationships between entities in scientific papers. ہمارا طریقہ اس کے استعمال پر بنیاد ہے جو 350 دھوپ کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے جو اپنے ہاتھ سے اظہار کی جگہ اور رابطہ کے ساتھ استعمال کی جاتی ہے. ہماری فرضی یہ ہے کہ یہ عمیق سیکھنے کی مدل ایک ہی موقع علم کاغذوں کے درمیان معاملات کو اٹھانے اور کلاس کے لئے لازم کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم کلام کا حصہ اور فاصلہ موجود انٹیوں کے لئے ہر کلم کے لئے انڈیڈنگ کا حصہ بناتے ہیں اور ہم تمام انٹیوں کو مارکر ناموں سے اندھا بناتے ہیں۔ اور ہم اس ڈیٹ سٹ کے نامبرالنس مسائل کو غالب کرنے کے لئے نمونے ٹیکنیک استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری معماری نے 35.4% کی F1-score کو اٹھانے کے کام کے لئے اور 18.5% کو ایک قدم سین کی بنیادی سازی کے ساتھ ارتباط کا کلاسی ٹاکس کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Bu sahifa esa SemEval-2018 Vazifaning 7 vazifasini olib tashlanadi, ilmiy qoʻllarda ma'lumotlar orasidan bogʻlamalarni ajratish va darajalashtirish haqida. Bizning fikrimiz qo'lbola qo'lbola qo'llangan obʼektlar va munosabatlar bilan on350 abstract (CNN) qo'llanmalar bilan ishlatilgan Neural Tarmoqni ishlatish asosida. Bizning fikrimiz esa, bu juda qiyin o'rganish modeli esa ilmiy qoʻllar orasidagi obʼektlarni ajratish va bir paytida o'zgartirish mumkin. Biz bir so'zning ichki soʻzning qismlari bilan gapirish qismidan foydalanamiz va hamma maʼlumotlarni marker nomi bilan ko'rsamiz. Ko'pchilik, bu maʼlumot sahifadagi balandlik muammolarini o'zgartirish uchun misol teknologidan foydalanamiz. Arxivchimizning bir qadam CNN'ning asosiy moslamalari bilan bog'liq tashkilotlari uchun 35.4% F1 scori topdi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này báo cáo sự tham gia của chúng ta cho nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác và phân loại các mối quan hệ giữa các thực thể trong các báo cáo khoa học. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta dựa trên việc sử dụng một mạng thần kinh có liên kết (CNN) được đào tạo on 350, với thực thể và quan hệ được ghi chú bằng tay. Theo giả thuyết của chúng tôi, mô hình học sâu sắc này có thể được áp dụng để chiết xuất và phân loại các mối quan hệ giữa các tổ chức cho các giấy tờ khoa học cùng một lúc. Chúng tôi sử dụng phần Ngôn ngữ và khoảng cách tới thực thể đích như một phần của sự nhúng vào mỗi từ và chúng tôi che mắt mọi thực thể bằng những cái tên đánh dấu. Chúng tôi cũng dùng kỹ thuật lấy mẫu để giải quyết vấn đề mất cân bằng trong bộ dữ liệu này. Kiến trúc của chúng tôi đạt được một điểm F1 của 35', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия отчита участието ни в Задача 7 за извличане и класифициране на взаимоотношения между субекти в научни статии. Нашият подход се основава на използването на конвелуционна неврална мрежа (CNN), обучена на 350 абстракт с ръчно анотирани същности и връзки. Нашата хипотеза е, че този модел на дълбоко учене може да бъде приложен за извличане и класифициране на отношенията между субектите за научни статии едновременно. Използваме Част от речта и разстоянията до целевите единици като част от вграждането за всяка дума и заслепяваме всички единици с имена на маркери. Освен това използваме техники за вземане на проби, за да преодолеем проблемите с дисбаланса на този набор от данни. Нашата архитектура получи оценка от 35,4% за задачата за извличане на релации и 18,5% за задачата за класификация на релации с основна конфигурация на една стъпка.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores deltagelse i SemEval-2018 Task 7 om udvinding og klassificering af relationer mellem enheder i videnskabelige artikler. Vores tilgang er baseret på brugen af et Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) trænet på 350 abstract med manuelt annoterede enheder og relationer. Vores hypotese er, at denne deep learning model kan anvendes til at udtrække og klassificere relationer mellem enheder for videnskabelige artikler på samme tid. Vi bruger Part-of-Speech og afstandene til målenhederne som en del af indlejringen for hvert ord, og vi blinder alle enheder med markørnavne. Derudover bruger vi stikprøveudtagningsteknikker til at overvinde ubalanceproblemerne i dette datasæt. Vores arkitektur opnåede en F1-score på 35,4% for relationsudvindingsopgaven og 18,5% for relationklassifikationsopgaven med en grundlæggende konfiguration af éttrins CNN.', 'nl': 'Deze paper rapporteert onze deelname aan SemEval-2018 Taak 7 over extractie en classificatie van relaties tussen entiteiten in wetenschappelijke artikelen. Onze aanpak is gebaseerd op het gebruik van een Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) getraind on350 abstract met handmatig geannoteerde entiteiten en relaties. Onze hypothese is dat dit deep learning model kan worden toegepast om relaties tussen entiteiten te extraheren en te classificeren voor wetenschappelijke artikelen op hetzelfde moment. We gebruiken voor elk woord het deel van spraak en de afstanden tot de doelentiteiten als onderdeel van de inbedding en we blinden alle entiteiten met markernamen. Daarnaast gebruiken we sampling technieken om de onevenwichtigheidsproblemen van deze dataset te overwinnen. Onze architectuur behaalde een F1-score van 35,4% voor de relatieontwikkelingstaak en 18,5% voor de relatieontwikkelingstaak met een basisconfiguratie van de ene stap CNN.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir izvještava našu sudjelovanje za zadatak 7 za pola Eval-2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji odnosa između subjekta u znanstvenim papirima. Naš pristup je temeljen na upotrebi konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN) obučene on350 abstrakta s ručno označenim entitetima i odnosima. Naša hipoteza je da se ovaj model dubokog učenja može primjenjivati za izvlačenje i klasifikaciju odnosa između entitata za naučne papire u is to vrijeme. Koristimo dio govora i udaljenosti ciljnim entitetima kao dio uključenja za svaku riječ i slijepimo sve entitete po imenima markera. Osim toga, koristimo tehnike za uzorak uzorka kako bi se prevazili problemi s nelegalnošću ovog seta podataka. Naša arhitektura je dobila F1 rezultat od 35,4% za zadatak izvlačenja odnosa i 18,5% za zadatak klasifikacije odnosa sa osnovnom konfiguracijom jednog koraka CNN.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag berichtet über unsere Teilnahme an SemEval-2018 Task 7 zur Extraktion und Klassifizierung von Beziehungen zwischen Entitäten in wissenschaftlichen Aufsätzen. Unser Ansatz basiert auf der Verwendung eines Convolutional Neural Network (CNN), trainiert on350 Abstract mit manuell annotierten Entitäten und Beziehungen. Unsere Hypothese ist, dass dieses Deep Learning Modell angewendet werden kann, um Beziehungen zwischen Entitäten für wissenschaftliche Arbeiten gleichzeitig zu extrahieren und zu klassifizieren. Wir verwenden den Sprachteil und die Entfernungen zu den Zielobjekten als Teil der Einbettung für jedes Wort und blenden alle Entitäten durch Markierungsnamen. Darüber hinaus verwenden wir Stichprobentechniken, um die Ungleichgewichte dieses Datensatzes zu überwinden. Unsere Architektur erhielt einen F1-Score von 35,4% für die Beziehungsextraktionsaufgabe und 18,5% für die Beziehungsklassifikationsaufgabe mit einer Grundkonfiguration der einen Stufe CNN.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가SemEval-18임무7에 참여한 상황을 보고하고 임무7은 과학 논문에서 실체 간의 관계의 추출과 분류를 포함한다.우리의 방법은 350개의 요약에서 수동 주석이 달린 실체와 관계를 훈련하는 권적신경망(CNN)을 사용하는 데 기초를 두고 있다.우리의 가설은 이런 깊이 있는 학습 모델은 과학 논문 실체 간의 관계를 동시에 추출하고 분류하는 데 쓰일 수 있다는 것이다.우리는 단어의 성질과 목표 실체까지의 거리를 모든 단어에 삽입하는 일부분으로 사용하고, 표기명을 통해 모든 실체를 차단합니다.그 밖에 우리는 샘플링 기술을 사용하여 이 데이터 집합의 불균형을 극복한다.우리의 구조는 관계 추출 임무와 관계 분류 임무에서 각각 35.4%와 18.5%의 F1 점수를 얻었고 기본적으로 CNN으로 설정되었다.', 'id': 'This paper reports our participation for SemEval-2018 Task 7 on extraction and classification of relationships between entities in scientific papers.  pendekatan kita berdasarkan penggunaan jaringan saraf konvolusi (CNN) dilatih pada 350 abstrak dengan entitas dan hubungan yang dicatat secara manual. Hipotesis kita adalah bahwa model belajar dalam ini dapat diaplikasikan untuk mengekstrak dan mengklasifikasi hubungan antara entitas untuk kertas ilmiah pada saat yang sama. Kami menggunakan bagian-dari-Bicara dan jarak ke entitas sasaran sebagai bagian dari embedding untuk setiap kata dan kami buta semua entitas dengan nama penanda. Selain itu, kami menggunakan teknik sampel untuk mengatasi masalah ketidakseimbangan dataset ini. Arkitektur kami mendapatkan skor F1 35,4% untuk tugas ekstraksi hubungan dan 18,5% untuk tugas klasifikasi hubungan dengan konfigurasi dasar dari satu langkah CNN.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ گزارش می\u200cدهد که مشارکت ما برای ماموریت 7 نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ در مورد استخراج و برقرار رابطه بین واحدها در کاغذهای علمی است. دستور ما بر اساس استفاده از شبکه عصبی (CNN) که در سال 350 مطلق آموزش داده شده با شرکت و رابطه\u200cهای دستگیر آموزش داده شده است. فرضیه ما اینه که این مدل یادگیری عمیق می\u200cتواند برای اخراج و کلاس کردن رابطه\u200cهای بین شرکتها برای کاغذهای علمی در همین زمان کاربرد شود. ما از بخش سخنرانی و فاصله\u200cهای هدف به عنوان بخشی از استفاده کردن برای هر کلمه استفاده می\u200cکنیم و همه چیز را به عنوان نام نشانی کور می\u200cکنیم. به علاوه، ما از فناوری\u200cهای نمونه\u200cگیری استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا مسائل نابرابری این مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cها را تغییر دهیم. معماری ما با یک پیکربندی بنیادی از یک مرحله سی.ن. یک مقدار F1 درجه ۳۵.۴ درصد برای کار خارج کردن ارتباط و ۱۸.۵ درصد برای کار جدید ارتباط با یک مرحله بنیادی سی.ن.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň SemEval-2018 Görevimiziň 7-nji sany bilim kagytlar arasyndaky guramlar hakynda gatnaşmagymyzy we klasifikasyny aýdýar. Biziň ýaryşymyz Ewir Nural Network (CNN) ullanyşymyza elimden nä350 abstrakt edilen suratlar we baglaýyşlar bilen bilinmeli. Biziň hökmümiz şu derin öwrenme nusgasyny bilim kagytlar üçin bir gezek guralýan guramlary çykarmak we klasifikasynda uygulanabilir. Biz söz aýratynyň parçasyny we maksadyň ýerlerini her söz üçin daşarylýan bir parçasyna ulanýarys we her zady işaretçi adlaryla kör edip görýäris. Ayrıca, bu veri takımının dengelenmesi meselelerini üstün etmek için örnek teknikleri kullanırız. Biziň arhitekturymyz 35.4% baglanyşyk taýýarlama täblisasy üçin bir F1-score tapdy we 18.5% CNN-yň bir adım derejesi bilen baglanyşyk täblisasy üçin bir hereket aldy.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument raporton pjesëmarrjen tonë për SemEval-2018 Task 7 mbi nxjerrjen dhe klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve midis njësive në letrat shkencore. Përqasja jonë është bazuar në përdorimin e një rrjeti nervor konvolutiv (CNN) të trajnuar në 350 abstrakt me njësi dhe marrëdhënie të anotuara manualisht. Hipoteza jonë është se ky model mësimi i thellë mund të aplikohet për të nxjerrë dhe klasifikuar marrëdhëniet midis njësive për letra shkencore në të njëjtën kohë. Ne përdorim Pjesën e Fjalës dhe distancat për njësitë objektive si pjesë e përfshirjes për çdo fjalë dhe i verbojmë të gjitha njësitë me emra marker. Përveç kësaj, ne përdorim teknika kampionari për të kapërcyer çështjet e paekuilibrit të këtij grupi të dhënash. Arkitektura jonë fitoi një rezultat F1 prej 35.4% për detyrën e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve dhe 18.5% për detyrën e klasifikimit të marrëdhënieve me një konfigurim bazë të një hapi CNN.', 'af': "Hierdie papier rapporteer ons deelnadering vir SemEval-2018 Taak 7 oor uitpakking en klasifikasie van verwantings tussen entiteite in wetenskaplike papier. Ons toegang is gebaseer op die gebruik van 'n Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerk (CNN) wat on350 abstrakte onderwerp het met hand aanmerkte entiteite en relasies. Ons hipotesis is dat hierdie diep leer model kan aanwend word om relasies tussen entiteite vir wetenskaplike papier in dieselfde tyd te uitpak en klassifiseer. Ons gebruik die Deel- van- spreek en die afstand na die doel entiteite as deel van die inbêding vir elke woord en ons blink al die entiteite deur merkernaams. In addition, we use sample techniques to overcome the imbalance issues of this data set. Ons arkitektuur het 'n F1-telling van 35.4% ontvang vir die verwanting uittrekking taak en 18.5% vir die verwanting klasifikasie taak met 'n basiese konfigurasie van die een stap CNN.", 'az': "Bu kağıt bizim yarım Eval-2018 Task 7 üçün bilimsel kağıtlar arasındakı ilişkilərin əlaqələrini çıxartmaq və klasifikasyonu barəsində xəbər verir. Bizim yaxınlığımız öz əlində məlumatları və əlaqələri ilə on350 abstraktu təhsil edilmiş Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) istifadəsinə dayandırılır. Bizim hipotezimiz, bu derin öyrənmə modeli elmi kağıtlar arasındakı bağlantıları istifadə etmək və dəyişdirmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Biz sözlərin parças ını və uzaqlarını hər sözün içərisində bir parçası olaraq məqsədilə istifadə edirik və bütün məqsədiləri marker adları ilə kor edirik. Buna görə də bu verilənlərin müqabiliyyəti üstün etmək üçün nümunə çəkmə tekniklərini istifadə edirik. Bizim arhitektürümüz bir adım CNN'in əsas konfigurasiyası ilə ilişkilərin istifadəsi üçün 35.4%-dən F1-score və 18.5%-dən istifadə edildi.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለሴmEval-2018 ስራ 7 ተግባራችንን በሳይንቀሳዊ ገጾች መካከል ግንኙነትን ለመውጣት እና ለመለየት ያሳያል፡፡ Our approach is based on the use of a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) trained on350 abstract with manually annotated entities and relations.  አካባቢነታችን ይህ ጥልቅ ትምህርት model በሳይንቀሳዊ ቃላት መካከል ግንኙነትን ለመውጣት እና ለመለያየት ይችላል፡፡ የአካባቢው የንግግር ክፍል እና የአካላቢው አካባቢዎች ለሁሉም ቃላት ክፍል እና አካባቢዎችን ሁሉ በአካባር ስም እናሳውራለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የዚህን ዳታ-ሰዓት ውጤቶችን ለማሸንፍ የምንምሳሌ ቴክክኖችን እንጠይቃለን፡፡ የመዝገብ ግንኙነት ለመውጣት ስራ 35.4 በመቶ F1 ነጥብ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը հայտարարում է մեր մասնակցությունը "ՍեմԵվալ-2018"-ի 7-րդ հանձնարարության մասին գիտական հոդվածներում կազմակերպությունների միջև եղած հարաբերությունների վերացման և դասակարգման մասին: Մեր մոտեցումը հիմնված է կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանցի (CNN) օգտագործման վրա, որը պատրաստված է 350-ի վերացական կողմից ձեռքով գրված առանձնահատկությունների և հարաբերությունների հետ: Մեր հիպոթեզն այն է, որ այս խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդելը կարող է օգտագործվել միաժամանակ գիտական փաստաթղթերի միջև կապերի վերացնելու և դասակարգելու համար: Մենք օգտագործում ենք խոսքի մասը և նպատակային էակների հեռավորությունը որպես յուրաքանչյուր բառի ներգրավման մաս, և մենք կոյրում ենք բոլոր էակները մարկերի անուններով: Ավելին, մենք օգտագործում ենք նմուշներ վերցնելու մեթոդներ, որպեսզի հաղթահարենք այս տվյալների համակարգի անհավասարակշռության խնդիրները: Մեր ճարտարապետությունը ստացավ F1-գնահատականը 35.4 տոկոսի հարաբերությունների վերացման խնդրի համար և 18.5 տոկոսի հարաբերությունների դասակարգման խնդրի համար մեկ քայլ CNN-ի հիմնական կառուցվածքով:', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaripoti ushiriki wetu wa kazi ya SemEval-2018 kuhusu utekelezaji na usambazaji wa mahusiano kati ya vyombo vya sayansi. Hatua yetu inatokana na matumizi ya Mtandao wa Neural (CNN) uliomfundisha on350 abstract with vifaa na mahusiano yanayoonyeshwa kwa mikononi. Utafiti wetu ni kwamba mtindo huu wa kujifunza kinaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kutengeneza na kutangaza mahusiano kati ya vitu vya sayansi kwa ajili ya karatasi za kisayansi wakati huo huo. Tunatumia Sehemu ya Hotuba na umbali wa vitu vya lengo kama sehemu ya makala kwa kila neno na tunavifua vyombo vyote kwa majina ya alama. Kwa nyongeza, tunatumia mbinu za sampuli ili kushinda masuala yasiyo na usawa wa seti hii ya data. Ujengo wetu ulipata kiwango cha F1 cha asilimia 35.4 kwa ajili ya kazi ya utekelezaji wa uhusiano na asilimia 18.5 kwa jukumu la usambazaji wa mahusiano kwa hatua moja ya CNN.', 'bn': 'This paper reports our participation for SemEval-2018 Task 7 on extraction and classification of relationships between entities in scientific papers.  আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) ব্যবহারের উপর ভিত্তিতে রয়েছে যারা নিজেদের বিরক্তিকর বস্তু ও সম্পর্কের সাথে প্রশিক আমাদের ধারণা হচ্ছে এই গভীর শিক্ষার মডেল একই সময়ে বৈজ্ঞানিক কাগজের জন্য বিষয়বস্তুর মধ্যে সম্পর্ক বের করে আনতে এবং বিশ্লেষণের সম্পর্ আমরা প্রতিটি শব্দের জন্য বিভিন্ন অংশ হিসেবে ব্যবহার করি এবং আমরা সব বস্তুকে চিহ্নিত নাম দিয়ে অন্ধ করি। এছাড়াও, আমরা এই ডাটাসেটের বৈষম্যের বিষয়গুলোকে জয়ী করার উদাহরণ প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করি। আমাদের স্থাপত্তি সিএনএন-এর একটি মৌলিক কনফিগারেশন দিয়ে সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য ৩৫.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir izvještava naše sudjelovanje u zadatku 7 za pola Evala-2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji odnosa između subjekta u naučnim papirima. Naš pristup je baziran na upotrebi konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN) obučene na 350 abstrakta sa ručno annotiranim entitetima i odnosima. Naša hipoteza je da se ovaj model dubokog učenja može primjenjivati za izvlačenje i klasifikaciju odnosa između entiteta za naučne papire u is to vrijeme. Koristimo dijelove govora i udaljenosti ciljnim entitetima kao dio uključenja za svaku riječ i slepimo sve entitete po imenima markera. Osim toga, koristimo tehnike za uzorak uzorka kako bi se prevazili problemi sa nedalansiranjem ovog seta podataka. Naša arhitektura je dobila F1 rezultat od 35,4% za zadatak izvlačenja odnosa i 18,5% za zadatak klasifikacije odnosa sa osnovnom konfiguracijom jednog koraka CNN.', 'ca': "Aquest paper relata la nostra participació en SemEval-2018 Task 7 sobre l'extracció i la classificació de les relacions entre entitats en articles científics. El nostre enfocament es basa en l'ús d'una Rede Neural Convolutiva (CNN) entrenada en 350 abstracts amb entitats i relacions anotats manualment. La nostra hipòtesi és que aquest model d'aprenentatge profund pot ser aplicat per extrair i classificar les relacions entre entitats per a escriptures científics al mateix temps. Utilitzem la Part-of-Speech i les distàncies cap a les entitats alvo com part de l'incorporació per cada paraula i ceguem totes les entitats amb noms marcadors. A més, utilitzem tècniques de recolliment de mostres per superar els problemes d'desequilibri d'aquest conjunt de dades. La nostra arquitectura va obtenir una puntuació F1 del 35,4% per la tasca d'extracció de relacions i del 18,5% per la tasca de classificació de relacions amb una configuració bàsica del CNN d'un pas.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje naši účast na SemEval-2018 Task 7 na extrakci a klasifikaci vztahů mezi subjekty ve vědeckých článcích. Náš přístup je založen na použití Convolucionální neuronové sítě (CNN) trénované on350 abstraktu s ručně anotovanými entitami a vztahy. Naší hypotézou je, že tento model hlubokého učení může být aplikován k extrakci a klasifikaci vztahů mezi entitami pro vědecké články současně. Pro každé slovo používáme část řeči a vzdálenosti k cílovým entitám jako součást vložení a všechny entity oslepíme názvy značek. Kromě toho používáme techniky vzorkování k překonání problémů nerovnováhy této datové sady. Naše architektura získala F1 skóre 35,4% pro úlohu extrakce vztahů a 18,5% pro úlohu klasifikace vztahů se základní konfigurací jednostupného CNN.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie osalemist SemEval-2018 ülesandes 7, mis käsitleb üksuste vaheliste suhete kaevandamist ja klassifitseerimist teaduslikes artiklites. Meie lähenemine põhineb konvolutsioonilise neuraalse võrgustiku (CNN) kasutamisel, mis on koolitatud 350 abstraktil käsitsi märgitud olemuste ja seostega. Meie hüpotees on, et seda sügavõppe mudelit saab rakendada teaduslike artiklite üksuste vaheliste suhete ekstraheerimiseks ja klassifitseerimiseks samal ajal. Me kasutame iga sõna manustamise osana kõneosa ja vahemaad sihtotstarbelistest olemitest ning pimestame kõik olemid markerinimede järgi. Lisaks kasutame valimimeetodeid, et lahendada selle andmekogumi tasakaalustamatuse probleeme. Meie arhitektuur saavutas F1-skoori 35,4% seose ekstraheerimise ülesande ja 18,5% seose klassifitseerimise ülesande puhul ühe astme CNN põhikonfiguratsiooniga.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli raportoi osallistumisestamme SemEval-2018 Task 7 -tehtävään, joka käsittelee yhteisöjen välisten suhteiden uuttamista ja luokittelua tieteellisissä julkaisuissa. Lähestymistapamme perustuu konvolutional neural Network (CNN), joka on koulutettu 350 abstraktiin, jossa on manuaalisesti merkittyjä entiteettejä ja suhteita. Hypoteesimme on, että tätä syväoppimisen mallia voidaan soveltaa samanaikaisesti poimimaan ja luokittelemaan entiteettien välisiä suhteita tieteellisiin julkaisuihin. Käytämme puheen osaa ja etäisyyksiä kohdeentiteetteihin osana jokaisen sanan upotusta ja sokaisemme kaikki entiteetit merkkinimillä. Lisäksi käytämme näytteenottotekniikoita tämän aineiston epätasapainoongelmien ratkaisemiseksi. Arkkitehtuurimme sai F1-pisteen 35,4% relaatiouuttotehtävästä ja 18,5% relaatioluokittelutehtävästä yhden vaiheen CNN:n peruskonfiguraatiolla.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing diputara urip nggambar kelas seminval-2013 task 7 Awakdhéwé wis dianggap nganggo gambaran ning manut ning titik Neyral Network (MT) sing ditambah on500 sing dikarepaké manut karo ngono barang manut. Kita suposis iku, nik akeh model sing dipun nguasar dumadhi iki iso nggawe ngupakan kelas karo pakem karo perusahaan kelas telas telas telas telas telas nang alih sing sampek bisa pasar sakjane sampek. Awak dhéwé ngubah-tanggal karo Kemerdekaan karo Menu Layout Nambah, kita ngubah teknik samplin kanggo ngerasah seneng pisan-dataset iki. architecture', 'he': 'העיתון הזה דווח על השתתפות שלנו למשימה 7 של SemEval-2018 על חיפוש וסיפור מערכות יחסים בין יחידות בעיתונים מדעיים. הגישה שלנו מבוססת על השימוש של רשת נוירולית משתנה (CNN) מאומנת על 350 אסטרקט עם יחסים ומצבעות ידנית. ההיפוטזה שלנו היא שמודל הלימוד העמוק הזה יכול להיות שימוש כדי לחלץ ולקלאס יחסים בין יחידות עבור מסמכים מדעיים באותו הזמן. אנו משתמשים בחלק של דיבור והמרחקים לאותות המטרה כחלק מהקישום לכל מילה ואנחנו עיוורים את כל היחידות בשמות סימנים. In addition, we use sampling techniques to overcome the imbalance issues of this dataset.  Our architecture obtained an F1-score of 35.4% for the relation extraction task and 18.5% for the relation classification task with a basic configuration of the one step CNN.', 'ha': "This paper reports our participation for SemEval-2018 Task 7 on extraction and classification of relationships between entities in scientific papers.  Tsarakanmu ne a kan amfani da shirin Naural Netware (CNN) wanda aka yi wa danganta on3 50 seprakt da abubuwa da hannayen da aka yi na zartar da. Ga hanyinmu na ce, za'a iya amfani da wannan misalin da ke ƙari dõmin ya fita kuma rarrabe danganci a tsakanin masu cikin takardar da aka sani sami. Munã yi amfani da Half-Amagana da tsakiya zuwa abun goani kamar rabon da ke cikin shirin duk kalma kuma muna makanta duk abubuwa da sunayen alama. Da wannan, Munã yi amfani da misãlai dõmin mu rinjãye masu buƙata na masu daidaita wa wannan dataset. An sami matsayinmu na F1-score ya 35.4% wa aikin muhimmanci da 18.5% wa aikin dangantaka da yana da tsarin tsari na kwanan ƙõfyutan CNN.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek poroča o našem sodelovanju pri nalogi 7 SemEval-2018 o ekstrakciji in klasifikaciji odnosov med subjekti v znanstvenih člankih. Naš pristop temelji na uporabi konvolucijske nevronske mreže (CNN), usposobljene na 350 abstraktu z ročno označenimi entitetami in relacijami. Naša hipoteza je, da je ta model globokega učenja mogoče uporabiti za izvlečevanje in klasifikacijo odnosov med subjekti za znanstvene prispevke hkrati. Za vsako besedo uporabljamo del govora in razdalje do ciljnih entitet kot del vdelave in slepimo vse entitete z imeni označevalcev. Poleg tega uporabljamo tehnike vzorčenja za premagovanje problemov neravnovesja tega nabora podatkov. Naša arhitektura je dosegla rezultat F1 35,4% za nalogo ekstrakcije relacij in 18,5% za nalogo klasifikacije relacij z osnovno konfiguracijo enega koraka CNN.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་དུ་ཕྱིར་ལོག་ཟིན་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་དང་དབྱེ་བ་ཡོད་པ། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་འདིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐྱེལ་བའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་གི་ལག་ལེན་བྱས་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་འཛིན་དུ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དཔེ་གཞི་འདིའི་དབྱེ་བ་དེ་དང་ཚན་རིག་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་དང་བར་ཐག་རིང་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ཚབ་འདིའི་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བཟོ་བརྩིས་གཞུང་གིས་གཞན་ལས་ཀྱང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་35.4% ཡིན་པས་དང་18.5% ཡིན་པས་ཚུལ་ལས་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀ'}
{'en': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Semantic Relation Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'ar': 'MIT-MEDG في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: تصنيف العلاقة الدلالية عبر شبكة الالتفاف العصبية', 'fr': 'MIT-MEDG au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Classification des relations sémantiques via un réseau de neurones à convolution', 'es': 'MIT-MEDG en SemEval-2018 Tarea 7: Clasificación de relaciones semánticas a través de la red neuronal de convolución', 'pt': 'MIT-MEDG na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Classificação de Relação Semântica via Rede Neural de Convolução', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のMIT - MEDGタスク7 ：畳み込みニューラルネットワークを介した意味関係分類', 'zh': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 任7:以卷积神经网络语义类', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 पर MIT-MEDG: Convolution तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के माध्यम से शब्दार्थ संबंध वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'MIT-MEDG на SemEval-2018 Задача 7: Классификация семантических отношений через нейронную сеть свертки', 'ga': 'MIT-MEDG ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Aicmiú an Chaidrimh Shéimeantaigh trí Líonra Néarach Convolution', 'hu': 'MIT-MEDG a SemEval-2018 7. feladat: Szemantikus kapcsolatok osztályozása a konvolúciós neurális hálózaton keresztül', 'ka': 'MIT-MEDG semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 7: სემანტიკური შესახებ კლასიფიკაცია', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Ταξινόμηση σημασματικών σχέσεων μέσω Νευρικού Δικτύου Σύγκλισης', 'it': 'MIT-MEDG al SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classificazione delle relazioni semantiche tramite rete neurale di convoluzione', 'lt': 'MIT-MEDG 2010–2018 m. pusėje 7 užduotis: Semantinių santykių klasifikavimas per konvoliucinį nervų tinklą', 'kk': 'MIT- MEDG at semiEval- 2018 Task 7: Semantic Relations Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'ms': 'MIT-MEDG pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Klasifikasi Hubungan Semantik melalui Rangkaian Neural Konveolution', 'mk': 'MIT-MEDG на SemEval-2018 задача 7: Класификација на семантичките односи преку конволуционална неурална мрежа', 'mt': 'MIT-MEDG f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7: Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Semantika permezz tan-Netwerk Newrali ta’ Konveoluzzjoni', 'no': 'MIT-MEDG at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Semantisk relasjonsklassifikasjon via konvolusjonsneiralnettverk', 'pl': 'MIT-MEDG w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 7: Klasyfikacja relacji semantycznych za pomocą sieci neuronowej konwolucji', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7: കണക്ഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് മുഖേന സെമാന്റിക് റിലേഷന്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d ചെയ്തു', 'ro': 'MIT-MEDG la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 7: Clasificarea relațiilor semantice prin rețeaua neurală de convoluție', 'mn': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'sr': 'MIT-MEDG na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 7: klasifikacija semantičkih odnosa putem konvolucione neurone mreže', 'si': 'MIT-MEDG at Halfeval-2018 Job 7: semantic Attendees Classication by ConVoltion neural network', 'so': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'sv': 'MIT-MEDG vid SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Klassificering av semantiska relationer via konvulutionsneuralt nätverk', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 7: ஒலிக்கோள் நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்', 'ur': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relations Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'uz': 'Vazifani 7: Semantic Relations Classification via Volume Neural Network', 'vi': 'MIT-MEDG tại SemEvl-208 Task 7: Semantic relation classification qua Convolution Neural Network', 'bg': 'МИТ-МЕДГ в Задача 7: Класификация на семантичните взаимоотношения чрез конволюционна неврална мрежа', 'hr': 'MIT-MEDG na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 7: klasifikacija semantičkih odnosa putem konvolucione neurone mreže', 'da': 'MIT-MEDG ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Klassificering af Semantic Relation via Convolution Neural Network', 'nl': 'MIT-MEDG op SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Semantische Relatieclassificatie via Convolution Neural Network', 'de': 'MIT-MEDG bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 7: Semantische Relationsklassifikation mittels Convolution Neural Network', 'ko': 'MIT-MEDG가SemEval-18 퀘스트 7: 권적신경 네트워크를 통해 의미관계 분류', 'fa': 'MIT-MEDG در وظیفه\u200cی نیمه\u200cای-۲۰۱۸: کلاس\u200cسازی رابطه\u200cهای نیمه\u200cای از طریق شبکه\u200cی عصبی تغییرات', 'id': 'MIT-MEDG di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Klasifikasi Hubungan Semantik melalui Jaringan Neural Konvelusi', 'sw': 'MIT-MEDG katika kazi ya SemEval-2018', 'sq': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'af': 'MIT-MEDG by SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Semantiese Relasifikasie deur Konvolusie Neurale Netwerk', 'tr': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'am': 'ስራ 7: Semantic Relation Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'hy': 'MIT-Media-ը, 2018-ի կիսագնդի 7-րդ գործում. Սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների դասակարգման միջոցով', 'az': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relations Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৭: কনভোলেশন নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের মাধ্যমে সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক বিভাগ', 'ca': 'MIT-MEDG a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification Semantic Relations via Convolution Neural Network', 'cs': 'Úkol 7: Klasifikace sémantických vztahů pomocí konveluční neuronové sítě', 'bs': 'MIT-MEDG na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 7: klasifikacija semantičkih odnosa putem konvolucione neurone mreže', 'et': 'MIT-MEDG SemEval-2018 ülesanne 7: semantilise suhte klassifitseerimine konvolutsiooni neurovõrgu kaudu', 'fi': 'MIT-MEDG SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Semanttinen suhde luokitus konvolution hermoverkon kautta', 'sk': 'MIT-MEDG na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Klasifikacija semantičnih odnosov prek konvolucijske nevralne mreže', 'he': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification via Convolution Neural Network', 'jv': 'MT-MEDG at semi-2008 task 7: semanti Relative CLSSification by convolution Neral Network', 'ha': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEV-2018 Tafiyar 7: Semantic Relation Classification through Conversion Neural Networkspace', 'bo': 'MIT-MEDG at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Classification via Convolution Neural Network'}
{'en': 'SemEval 2018 Task 7 tasked participants to build a system to classify two entities within a sentence into one of the 6 possible relation types. We tested 3 classes of models : Linear classifiers, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) models, and Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) models. Ultimately, the CNN model class proved most performant, so we specialized to this model for our final submissions. We improved performance beyond a vanilla CNN by including a variant of negative sampling, using custom word embeddings learned over a corpus of ACL articles, training over corpora of both tasks 1.1 and 1.2, using reversed feature, using part of context words beyond the entity pairs and using ensemble methods to improve our final predictions. We also tested attention based pooling, up-sampling, and data augmentation, but none improved performance. Our model achieved rank 6 out of 28 (macro-averaged F1-score : 72.7) in subtask 1.1, and rank 4 out of 20 (macro F1 : 80.6) in subtask 1.2.', 'ar': 'كلف SemEval 2018 Task 7 المشاركين ببناء نظام لتصنيف كيانين في جملة إلى واحد من أنواع العلاقات الستة المحتملة. اختبرنا 3 فئات من النماذج: المصنفات الخطية ونماذج الذاكرة طويلة المدى (LSTM) ونماذج الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية (CNN). في النهاية ، أثبتت فئة طرازات CNN أنها الأكثر أداءً ، لذلك تخصصنا في هذا النموذج لتقديم عروضنا النهائية. لقد قمنا بتحسين الأداء بما يتجاوز الفانيليا CNN من خلال تضمين متغير لأخذ العينات السلبية ، باستخدام تضمين الكلمات المخصصة التي تم تعلمها على مجموعة من مقالات ACL ، والتدريب على مجموعة من المهمتين 1.1 و 1.2 ، باستخدام ميزة معكوسة ، باستخدام جزء من كلمات السياق خارج أزواج الكيانات واستخدام طرق التجميع لتحسين توقعاتنا النهائية. اختبرنا أيضًا التجميع القائم على الانتباه ، وأخذ العينات ، وزيادة البيانات ، ولكن لم يتم تحسين الأداء. حقق نموذجنا المرتبة 6 من 28 (متوسط درجة F1 الكلية: 72.7) في المهمة الفرعية 1.1 ، والمرتبة 4 من 20 (الماكرو F1: 80.6) في المهمة الفرعية 1.2.', 'pt': 'A Tarefa 7 do SemEval 2018 encarregou os participantes de construir um sistema para classificar duas entidades dentro de uma frase em um dos 6 tipos de relação possíveis. Testamos 3 classes de modelos: classificadores lineares, modelos de Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) e modelos de Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN). Por fim, a classe de modelo da CNN provou ser a mais eficiente, então nos especializamos nesse modelo para nossos envios finais. Melhoramos o desempenho além de uma CNN vanilla, incluindo uma variante de amostragem negativa, usando incorporação de palavras personalizadas aprendidas em um corpus de artigos da ACL, treinando corpora de ambas as tarefas 1.1 e 1.2, usando o recurso invertido, usando parte das palavras de contexto além dos pares de entidades e usando métodos de conjunto para melhorar nossas previsões finais. Também testamos pooling baseado em atenção, up-sampling e aumento de dados, mas nenhum melhorou o desempenho. Nosso modelo alcançou a classificação 6 de 28 (pontuação F1 média macro: 72,7) na subtarefa 1.1 e a classificação 4 de 20 (macro F1: 80,6) na subtarefa 1.2.', 'fr': "SemEval 2018 Task 7 a demandé aux participants de créer un système permettant de classer deux entités au sein d'une phrase dans l'un des 6 types de relations possibles. Nous avons testé 3 classes de modèles\xa0: des classificateurs linéaires, des modèles de mémoire à long terme (LSTM) et des modèles de réseaux de neurones convolutifs (CNN). En fin de compte, la classe de modèles CNN s'est révélée la plus performante, nous nous sommes donc spécialisés dans ce modèle pour nos soumissions finales. Nous avons amélioré les performances au-delà d'un CNN standard en incluant une variante de l'échantillonnage négatif, en utilisant des intégrations de mots personnalisées apprises sur un corpus d'articles ACL, en nous entraînant sur des corpus des deux tâches 1.1 et 1.2, en utilisant la fonction inversée, en utilisant une partie des mots contextuels au-delà des paires d'entités et en utilisant des méthodes d'ensemble pour améliorer nos prévisions finales. Nous avons également testé le regroupement basé sur l'attention, le suréchantillonnage et l'augmentation des données, mais aucun n'a amélioré les performances. Notre modèle a atteint le rang 6 sur 28 (score F1 macro-moyen\xa0: 72,7) dans la sous-tâche 1.1, et le rang 4 sur 20 (macro F1\xa0: 80,6) dans la sous-tâche 1.2.", 'es': 'La tarea 7 de SemEval 2018 encargó a los participantes que crearan un sistema para clasificar dos entidades dentro de una oración en uno de los 6 tipos de relación posibles. Probamos 3 clases de modelos: clasificadores lineales, modelos de memoria a corto plazo (LSTM) y modelos de red neuronal convolucional (CNN). En última instancia, la clase modelo de CNN demostró ser la más eficaz, por lo que nos especializamos en este modelo para nuestras presentaciones finales. Mejoramos el rendimiento más allá de una CNN convencional al incluir una variante de muestreo negativo, el uso de incrustaciones de palabras personalizadas aprendidas a través de un corpus de artículos de ACL, la capacitación sobre los corpus de las tareas 1.1 y 1.2, el uso de la función inversa, el uso de parte de las palabras de contexto más allá de los pares de entidades y el uso de métodos de conjunto para mejorar nuestras predicciones finales. También probamos la agrupación basada en la atención, el muestreo ascendente y el aumento de datos, pero ninguno mejoró el rendimiento. Nuestro modelo alcanzó el rango 6 de 28 (puntuación F1 macropromediada: 72.7) en la subtarea 1.1, y el rango 4 de 20 (macro F1:80.6) en la subtarea 1.2.', 'ja': 'SemEval 2018タスク7は、参加者に、文章内の2つのエンティティを6つの可能なリレーションタイプのいずれかに分類するためのシステムを構築するように命じた。線形分類子、長期記憶（ LSTM ）モデル、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）モデルの3つのクラスのモデルをテストしました。最終的に、CNNモデルクラスは最もパフォーマンスが高いことが証明されたため、最終的な提出のためにこのモデルに専念しました。バニラCNNを超えたパフォーマンスを向上させました。ネガティブサンプリングのバリアントを含み、ACL記事のコーパスで学んだカスタムワード埋め込みを使用し、タスク1.1と1.2の両方のコーパスでトレーニングし、逆転機能を使用し、エンティティペアを超えたコンテキストワードの一部を使用し、アンサンブルメソッドを使用して最終予測を改善しました。また、アテンションベースのプーリング、アップサンプリング、データ拡張もテストしましたが、いずれもパフォーマンスが向上しませんでした。私たちのモデルは、サブタスク1.1で28のランク6 （マクロ平均F 1スコア： 72.7 ）、サブタスク1.2で20のランク4 （マクロF 1 ： 80.6 ）を達成しました。', 'zh': 'SemEval 2018 务 7 求参与者为一统,以句中二体为 6 疑其一也。 试3:线性类器,长短期记(LSTM)与卷积神经网络(CNN)模。 终于CNN 模之类,性能最高,故终于交而专究之。 吾以含负采样之变体,用于ACL文语料库之自定义词嵌,练于任1.1、1.2之语料库,用于特征,用实体之上下文词及用集成之法以改吾终测,以重常CNN之性。 试于注意之池化、上采样、数据,而莫能加焉。 子 1.1 中 28 (宏观均 F1 得分:72.7)中排名第 6,子 1.2 中 20 (宏 F1:80.6)中排名第 4。', 'hi': 'SemEval 2018 टास्क 7 ने प्रतिभागियों को एक वाक्य के भीतर दो संस्थाओं को 6 संभावित संबंध प्रकारों में से एक में वर्गीकृत करने के लिए एक प्रणाली बनाने का काम सौंपा। हमने मॉडल के 3 वर्गों का परीक्षण किया: रैखिक क्लासिफायर, लंबी अल्पकालिक मेमोरी (एलएसटीएम) मॉडल, और कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) मॉडल। आखिरकार, सीएनएन मॉडल क्लास सबसे अधिक प्रदर्शन करने वाला साबित हुआ, इसलिए हमने अपने अंतिम प्रस्तुतियों के लिए इस मॉडल को विशेष रूप से तैयार किया। हमने नकारात्मक नमूने के एक संस्करण को शामिल करके एक वेनिला सीएनएन से परे प्रदर्शन में सुधार किया, एसीएल लेखों के एक कॉर्पस पर सीखे गए कस्टम शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके, 1.1 और 1.2 दोनों कार्यों के कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रशिक्षण, उलट सुविधा का उपयोग करके, इकाई जोड़े से परे संदर्भ शब्दों के हिस्से का उपयोग करके और हमारी अंतिम भविष्यवाणियों को बेहतर बनाने के लिए पहनावा विधियों का उपयोग करना। हमने ध्यान आधारित पूलिंग, अप-सैंपलिंग और डेटा वृद्धि का भी परीक्षण किया, लेकिन किसी ने भी प्रदर्शन में सुधार नहीं किया। हमारे मॉडल ने उप-कार्य 1.1 में 28 (मैक्रो-औसत F1-स्कोर: 72.7) में से 6 रैंक हासिल की, और उप-कार्य 1.2 में 20 (मैक्रो F1: 80.6) में से 4 रैंक प्राप्त की।', 'ru': 'Задача 7 SemEval 2018 поставила перед участниками задачу построить систему классификации двух сущностей в рамках предложения на один из 6 возможных типов отношений. Мы протестировали 3 класса моделей: линейные классификаторы, модели длинной краткосрочной памяти (LSTM) и модели сверточной нейронной сети (CNN). В конечном счете, класс модели CNN оказался наиболее эффективным, поэтому мы специализировались на этой модели для наших окончательных представлений. Мы улучшили производительность за пределами ванильного CNN, включив вариант отрицательной выборки, используя пользовательские вставки слов, изученные над корпусом статей ACL, обучение над корпусами обеих задач 1.1 и 1.2, используя обратный признак, используя часть контекстных слов за пределами пар сущностей и используя ансамблевые методы для улучшения наших окончательных прогнозов. Мы также протестировали объединение на основе внимания, выборку и увеличение данных, но ни одно из них не улучшило производительность. Наша модель достигла 6-го места из 28 (макроусредненный показатель F1: 72,7) в подзадаче 1.1 и 4-го места из 20 (макро F1: 80,6) в подзадаче 1.2.', 'ga': "SemEval 2018 Chuir Tasc 7 de thasc ar rannpháirtithe córas a thógáil chun dhá aonán laistigh d’abairt a rangú i gceann de na 6 chineál caidrimh fhéideartha. Rinneamar tástáil ar 3 aicme samhlacha: Aicmitheoirí líneacha, samhlacha Cuimhne Ghearrthéarmach Fhadta (LSTM), agus samhlacha Líonra Neural Róin (CNN). I ndeireadh na dála, ba é an rang samhail CNN an ceann is feidhmiúla, agus mar sin rinneamar sainfheidhmiú ar an tsamhail seo dár n-aighneachtaí deiridh. D'fheabhsaíomar feidhmíocht níos faide ná CNN fanaile trí mhalairt de shampláil dhiúltach a chur san áireamh, úsáid a bhaint as leabaithe focal saincheaptha a foghlaimíodh thar chorpas d'ailt ACL, oiliúint thar corpas an dá thasc 1.1 agus 1.2, ag baint úsáide as gné droim ar ais, ag baint úsáide as cuid de na focail chomhthéacs níos faide ná na péirí aonáin. agus modhanna ensemble a úsáid chun ár dtuar deiridh a fheabhsú. Rinneamar tástáil freisin ar chomhthiomsú aird-bhunaithe, ar uas-shampláil, agus ar mhéadú sonraí, ach níor tháinig aon fheabhas ar fheidhmíocht. Bhain ár múnla céim 6 amach as 28 (scór macra-mheánmhéide F1: 72.7) i bhfothasc 1.1, agus céim 4 as 20 (macra F1: 80.6) i bhfothasc 1.2.", 'hu': 'SemEval 2018 A 7. feladat arra bízta a résztvevőket, hogy építsenek egy rendszert, amely két entitást osztályoz egy mondatban a 6 lehetséges kapcsolattípus egyikébe. 3 modellosztályt teszteltünk: Lineáris osztályozók, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) modellek és Convolucional Neural Network (CNN) modellek. Végül a CNN modellosztály a legteljesítményesebbnek bizonyult, ezért erre a modellre specializálódtunk a végső beadványokhoz. Javítottuk a teljesítményt a vanília CNN-en túl azáltal, hogy a negatív mintavétel egy változatát is bevonjuk, egyéni szóbeágyazásokat használtunk az ACL cikkekből álló korpuszon keresztül, az 1.1 és az 1.2 feladatokból álló korpuszok feletti képzést, fordított funkciót használtunk, a kontextusszavak egy részét használtuk az entitáspárokon túl, és együttes módszereket használtunk a végső előrejelzéseink javítására. Teszteltük a figyelem alapú összevonást, a mintavételt és az adatok nagyobbítását is, de egyik sem javult a teljesítmény. Modellünk elérte a 6. helyet a 28-ból (makróátlagos F1-pontszám: 72,7) az 1.1-es részfeladatban, és a 4. helyet a 20-ból (makró F1: 80,6) az 1.2-es részfeladatban.', 'el': 'Η εργασία 7 ανέθεσε στους συμμετέχοντες να δημιουργήσουν ένα σύστημα για την ταξινόμηση δύο οντοτήτων μέσα σε μια πρόταση σε έναν από τους έξι πιθανούς τύπους σχέσεων. Δοκιμάσαμε τρεις κατηγορίες μοντέλων: γραμμικούς ταξινομητές, μοντέλα μακροχρόνιας βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης (και μοντέλα καμπυλωτών νευρωνικών δικτύων (ΚΝΝ). Τελικά, η κατηγορία μοντέλων αποδείχθηκε πιο αποτελεσματική, οπότε ειδικευτήκαμε σε αυτό το μοντέλο για τις τελικές μας υποβολές. Βελτιώσαμε την απόδοση πέρα από ένα βανίλια με τη συμπερίληψη μιας παραλλαγής αρνητικής δειγματοληψίας, χρησιμοποιώντας προσαρμοσμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων που μάθαμε πάνω από ένα σώμα άρθρων, εκπαίδευση πάνω από σώματα και των δύο εργασιών 1.1 και 1.2, χρησιμοποιώντας αντίστροφη λειτουργία, χρησιμοποιώντας μέρος λέξεων περιβάλλοντος πέρα από τα ζεύγη οντότητας και χρησιμοποιώντας μεθόδους συνόλου για να βελτιώσουμε τις τελικές προβλέψεις μας. Δοκιμάσαμε επίσης τη συγκέντρωση με βάση την προσοχή, τη δειγματοληψία και την αύξηση δεδομένων, αλλά καμία δεν βελτίωσε την απόδοση. Το μοντέλο μας πέτυχε την κατάταξη 6 από 28 (μακρομέση βαθμολογία F1: 72.7) στην υποταγή 1.1 και την κατάταξη 4 από 20 (μακροεντολή F1: 80.6) στην υποταγή 1.2.', 'ka': 'SemEval 2018 დავალება 7 დავალებული მომხმარებელი სისტემის შექმნა ორი ინტერტიკის კლასიფიკაცია შესაძლებელი 6 შესაძლებელი შესახებ ტიპში. ჩვენ მოდელების 3 კლასის ტესტირება: ლინიური კლასიფიკაციები, სიგრძელი სიგრძელი მეხსიერი (LSTM) მოდელები და კონველური ნეიროლური ქსელი (CNN) მოდელები. საბოლოოდ, CNN მოდელის კლასი უფრო მუშაობელია, ამიტომ ჩვენ ამ მოდელის სპეციალურად გავაკეთეთ ჩვენი საბოლოო დამუშაობისთვის. ჩვენ განილია CNN-ის გარეშე გავამუშავებეთ გამოყენებას, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული სიტყვების გარეშე გამოყენება, რომელიც ACL წესების კორპოსს გასწავლილი სიტყვების გამოყენება, რომელიც ორივე საქმების კოპორაციის გარეშე 1.1 და 1.2 გამოყენება, შემ ჩვენ ასევე შევცვალოთ ინტერსოციის დაბაზეული ყველაფერი, გამოყენება და მონაცემების აზექტირება, მაგრამ არაფერი უკეთესი პროცესი. ჩვენი მოდელი 28-დან 6 წერტილი (მაკრო განსაზღვრებული F1 წერტილი: 72.7) 1.1 წერტილი და 20-დან 4 წერტილი (მაკრო F1: 80.6) 1.2 წერტილი.', 'it': "SemEval 2018 Task 7 ha incaricato i partecipanti di costruire un sistema per classificare due entità all'interno di una frase in uno dei 6 possibili tipi di relazione. Abbiamo testato 3 classi di modelli: classificatori lineari, modelli LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) e modelli CNN (Convolutional Neural Network). Alla fine, la classe di modelli CNN si è dimostrata più performante, quindi ci siamo specializzati a questo modello per le nostre proposte finali. Abbiamo migliorato le prestazioni oltre una CNN vanilla includendo una variante di campionamento negativo, utilizzando incorporazioni di parole personalizzate apprese su un corpus di articoli ACL, addestrarci sui corpora di entrambe le attività 1.1 e 1.2, utilizzando funzionalità invertite, utilizzando parte di parole di contesto oltre le coppie di entità e utilizzando metodi ensemble per migliorare le nostre previsioni finali. Abbiamo anche testato pooling, up-sampling e aumento dei dati basati sull'attenzione, ma nessuna ha migliorato le prestazioni. Il nostro modello ha raggiunto il rank 6 su 28 (punteggio F1 macro-medio: 72,7) nella sottomissione 1.1, e il rank 4 su 20 (F1 macro: 80,6) nella sottomissione 1.2.", 'lt': '2018 m. SemEval 7 užduotis pavedė dalyviams sukurti sistemą, pagal kurią du subjektai pagal sakinį klasifikuojami į vieną iš 6 galimų santykių tipų. Išbandėme 3 modelių klases: linijinius klasifikatorius, ilgalaikio trumpalaikio atminties (LSTM) modelius ir konvolucinio nervinio tinklo (CNN) modelius. Galiausiai CNN modelių klasė pasirodė veiksmingiausia, todėl specializuotame šiam modeliui savo galutiniams pareiškimams. Mes pagerėjome rezultatus už vanilės CNN ribų, įtraukdami neigiamų mėginių ėmimo variant ą, naudodami specialius žodžių įdėjimus, išmokytus per ACL gaminių korpusą, mokymus per korpusą abiejų užduočių 1.1 ir 1.2, naudojant atvirkštinę savybę, naudojant dalį kontekstinių žodžių už subjekto poros ir naudojant komplekso metodus, kad pagerintume galutines prognozes. Taip pat išbandėme dėmesio kaupimą, mėginių ėmimą ir duomenų didinimą, tačiau jų rezultatai nebuvo pagerinti. Mūsų modelis pasiekė 6 laipsnį iš 28 (makroekonominio vidurkio F1 balas: 72,7) 1.1 papunktyje ir 4 laipsnį iš 20 (makroekonominio F1: 80,6) 1.2 papunktyje.', 'mk': 'SemEval 2018 задача 7 ги задолжи учесниците да изградат систем за класификување на двата ентитети во рамките на реченица во еден од шестте можни типови на врски. Тестиравме 3 класи на модели: линијарни класификатори, долгорочни модели на краткорочен меморија (ЛСТМ) и модели на конволуционална неврална мрежа (СНН). На крајот, класата на моделот на СНН се покажа најизвршна, па се специјализиравме на овој модел за нашите последни предлози. Ние ја подобривме изведбата надвор од ванила CNN вклучувајќи варијант на негативно примерување, користејќи сопствени зборови вградени преку корпус на ACL статии, обука над корпусот на двете задачи 1.1 и 1.2, користејќи ја обврзаната карактеристика, користејќи дел од контекстните зборови надвор од паровите на ентитетите и користејќи Исто така, ги тестиравме спојувањето на вниманието, примерувањето и зголемувањето на податоците, но нема подобрени резултати. Нашиот модел постигна ранг 6 од 28 (макро-просечна оценка F1: 72,7) во подпрашањето 1.1, а ранг 4 од 20 (макро F1: 80,6) во подпрашањето 1.2.', 'kk': '2018 жылдың semiEval 7 тапсырманың қатысушылары сұлбаның біріне 6 мүмкін қатынау түрлеріне екі нысанды классификациялау үшін жүйесін құру үшін. Біз 3 түрлі моделдерді сынап көрдік: сызық классификациялары, ұзын қысқа уақыт жады (LSTM) моделдері және конверсиялық нейрал желі (CNN) моделдері. Соңында CNN үлгі класы ең жақсы жұмыс істеді, сондықтан біз соңғы жұмыс істеу үшін осы үлгі арнаулы болдық. Біз уанилла CNN артығында қарапайым мәліметті түрлендіріп, ACL мақалалардың корпус арқылы үйренген сөздерді қолдануға арналған, 1.1 және 1.2 тапсырмалардың корпус арқылы қолдануға арналған, қайтарылған мүмкіндіктерді қолдануға арналған, біздің соңғы тапсы Біз сондай-ақ біріктіру, үлгілеу және деректерді жақсартуға негізделген, бірақ ешқандай жақсарту жоқ. Біздің үлгіміз 28- ден 6- жолды (макро- орташа F1- нөмірі: 72, 7) 1, 1- сұрақ астында, 20- ден 4- жолды (макро F1: 80, 6) 1, 2- сұрақ астында.', 'ms': 'SemEval 2018 Tugas 7 tugaskan peserta untuk membina sistem untuk mengklasifikasikan dua entiti dalam satu kalimat ke salah satu daripada 6 jenis hubungan yang mungkin. Kami menguji 3 kelas model: Klasifikasi linear, model Memori Panjang Terma (LSTM), dan model Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional (CNN). Akhirnya, kelas model CNN terbukti paling berkesan, jadi kami khusus untuk model ini untuk penghantaran akhir kami. Kami meningkatkan prestasi melebihi CNN vanilla dengan termasuk varian penerimaan sampel negatif, menggunakan penyembedding kata suai belajar melalui korpus artikel ACL, latihan melalui korpra kedua-dua tugas 1.1 dan 1.2, menggunakan ciri terbalik, menggunakan sebahagian kata konteks melebihi pasangan entiti dan menggunakan kaedah ensemble untuk meningkatkan ramalan akhir kita. Kami juga menguji pengumpulan perhatian berdasarkan perhatian, pengumpulan sampel, dan peningkatan data, tetapi tiada prestasi yang lebih baik. Model kami mencapai peringkat 6 daripada 28 (makro-rata-rata F1-skor: 72.7) dalam subtanya 1.1, dan peringkat 4 daripada 20 (makro F1: 80.6) dalam subtanya 1.2.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7 പങ്കാളികള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം പണിയാന്\u200d പണിയുന്നു. വാക്കില്\u200d ഒരു വിധിയില്\u200d രണ്ട് വസ്തുക്കളെ വിശേഷിപ്പി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മൂന്നു ക്ലാസ് മോഡലുകളെ പരീക്ഷിച്ചു: ലൈനൈല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫറുകള്\u200d, ലോങ്ങ് ചുരുക്കി- ടെര്\u200dമിം മെമ്മറി (LSTM) മോഡലുകള്\u200d, കോണ്\u200dവോള്\u200dഷന അവസാനം, CNN മോഡല്\u200d ക്ലാസ് ഏറ്റവും പ്രകടനിധിയായി തെളിയിച്ചു. അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ അവസാനത്തെ കീഴടങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി ഈ മോഡലിന നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വായില്ലാത്ത സിഎനിനെക്കാള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു നേരിട്ട മാതൃകയുടെ വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച്, എസിഎല്\u200d ലേഖനങ്ങളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുകളില്\u200d പഠിച്ച വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട്, ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടി ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d 28-ല്\u200d നിന്നും 6 ല്\u200d എത്തി (മാക്രോ ശരാവിയായ F1-സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട്: 72. 7) സബ്ബസ്സ് 1. 1 ലും 20 ല്\u200d നിന്നും 4 നില (മാക്രോ F1: 80. 6) സബ്ജിസ് 1. 2', 'mn': 'SemEval 2018 Task 7 Бид 3 төрлийн загварыг шалгаж үзсэн: шулууны классификатор, урт богино-Term Memory (LSTM) загвар болон Конvolutional Neural Network (CNN) загвар. Эцэст нь CNN загварын хичээл хамгийн үйлдвэрлэгчдийг баталсан. Тэгэхээр бид эцсийн даалгаврын загварын тулд энэ загварыг мэргэжилсэн. Бид ванила CNN-ээс илүү хөгжүүлэх үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулсан. Ямар ч сөрөг хэлбэрийг ашиглаж, ACL бичлэгийн корпус дээр суралцаж, 1.1 болон 1.2 ажиллагааны корпора дээр суралцах үйл ажиллагааг ашиглаж, эсрэг хэлбэрийг ашиглаж, үйл ажиллагааны хоёрын гадна контекст үг Мөн бид анхаарлын төлөвлөгөө цуглуулах, хуваалцах, өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийг шалгаж үзсэн. Гэхдээ ямар ч үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахгүй. Бидний загварын загвар нь 28-аас 6-р (макро дундаж F1-тоо: 72.7) хүртэл 1.1-р суралцаж, 20-аас 4-р (макро F1: 80.6) хүртэл 1.2-р суралцаж байна.', 'mt': 'SemEval 2018 Task 7 taskat lill-parteċipanti biex jibnu sistema biex jikklassifikaw żewġ entitajiet f’sentenza f’wieħed mis-6 tipi possibbli ta’ relazzjoni. We tested 3 classes of models: Linear classifiers, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) models, and Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) models.  Ultimately, the CNN model class proved most performant, so we specialized to this model for our final submissions.  Aħna tejbna l-prestazzjoni lil hinn minn CNN vanilla billi inkludew varjant ta’ teħid ta’ kampjuni negattivi, bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem personalizzati li jitgħallmu fuq korpus ta’ oġġetti ACL, taħriġ fuq korpura taż-żewġ kompiti 1.1 u 1.2, bl-użu ta’ karatteristika riveduta, bl-użu ta’ parti mill-kliem kuntest lil hinn mill-pari tal-entità u bl-użu ta’ metodi ta’ ensemble Ittestjna wkoll il-ġbir flimkien, it-teħid ta’ kampjuni u ż-żieda tad-dejta bbażati fuq l-attenzjoni, iżda l-ebda prestazzjoni mtejba. Il-mudell tagħna kiseb grad 6 minn 28 (punteġġ F1 makro-medju: 72.7) fis-sottomistoqsija 1.1, u grad 4 minn 20 (makro F1: 80.6) fis-sottomistoqsija 1.2.', 'no': 'SemEval 2018 Oppgåve 7 oppgåve deltakarar for å bygge eit system for å klassifisera to entiteter i eit setning til ein av dei 6 moglege relasjonstypane. Vi testa 3 klasser med modeller: lineær klassifiserer, langsiktig minne (LSTM) modeller og konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk (CNN) modeller. Slutt har CNN-modelleklassen vist mest utføringslag, så vi spesialiserte til denne modellen for våre siste oppføringar. Vi forbetra utviklinga enn ein vanilla CNN ved å inkludere ein variant av negativ prøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøve over både oppgåver 1.1 og 1.2 ved å bruka omvendt funksjon ved å bruka del av kontekstord enn einingspar og bruka Vi testa også oppmerksomhetsbasert samling, oppprøvesamling og data-økning, men ingen forbetra utvikling. Modellen vårt oppnådd rekke 6 ut av 28 (makro gjennomsnittt F1- poeng: 72, 7) i subtspørjinga 1, 1 og rekke 4 ut av 20 (makro F1: 80, 6) i subtspørjinga 1, 2.', 'pl': 'SemEval 2018 Zadanie 7 zleciło uczestnikom zbudowanie systemu klasyfikacji dwóch podmiotów w jednym z sześciu możliwych typów relacji. Testowaliśmy trzy klasy modeli: klasyfikatory liniowe, modele pamięci krótkoterminowej (LSTM) oraz modele sieci neuronowej (CNN). Ostatecznie klasa modeli CNN okazała się najbardziej wydajna, więc specjalizowaliśmy się do tego modelu dla naszych ostatecznych zgłoszeń. Poprawiliśmy wydajność poza waniliową CNN poprzez włączenie wariantu negatywnego próbkowania, wykorzystanie niestandardowych osadzeń słów nauczonych w korpusie artykułów ACL, szkolenie nad korpusami obu zadań 1.1 i 1.2, wykorzystanie funkcji odwróconej, wykorzystanie części słów kontekstowych poza parami jednostek oraz wykorzystanie metod zespołowych do poprawy naszych ostatecznych przewidywań. Przetestowaliśmy również pooling oparty na uwadze, up-sampling i powiększanie danych, ale żadna nie poprawiła wydajności. Nasz model osiągnął pozycję 6 z 28 (makro-średni wynik F1: 72.7) w podzadaniu 1.1, a pozycję 4 z 20 (makro F1: 80.6) w podzadaniu 1.2.', 'ro': 'Sarcina 7 SemEval 2018 a însărcinat participanții să construiască un sistem de clasificare a două entități dintr-o propoziție într-unul dintre cele 6 tipuri posibile de relații. Am testat 3 clase de modele: clasificatoare liniare, modele LSTM (Long Short-Term Memory) și modele CNN (Convoluțional Neural Network). În cele din urmă, clasa de modele CNN s-a dovedit a fi cea mai performantă, așa că ne-am specializat pe acest model pentru depunerile noastre finale. Am îmbunătățit performanța dincolo de o CNN vanilie prin includerea unei variante de eșantionare negativă, folosind încorporări personalizate de cuvinte învățate în cadrul unui corpus de articole ACL, instruire asupra corporelor ambelor sarcini 1.1 și 1.2, folosind funcția inversată, folosind o parte din cuvinte contextuale dincolo de perechile de entități și folosind metode ansamblu pentru a îmbunătăți predicțiile noastre finale. De asemenea, am testat gruparea bazată pe atenție, eșantionarea și mărirea datelor, dar niciuna nu a îmbunătățit performanța. Modelul nostru a obținut clasamentul 6 din 28 (scor F1 macro-mediu: 72,7) în subactivitatea 1.1 și clasamentul 4 din 20 (F1 macro: 80,6) în subactivitatea 1.2.', 'sr': 'SemEval 2018. zadatak 7 zadužen sudionici da izgrade sistem za klasifikaciju dva entiteta unutar rečenice u jednu od šest mogućih vrsta odnosa. Testirali smo 3 klase modela: linijske klasifikatore, dugoročne uspomene (LSTM) modele i konvolucionalne neurone mreže (CNN) modele. Na kraju, CNN model klasa je dokazala najizvršniji, pa smo specijalizovali ovaj model za naše poslednje podatke. Poboljšali smo izvan vanile CNN-a, uključujući variant negativnog uzoraka, koristeći obične rečenice koje su naučile preko korpusa ACL članaka, obuku preko korpusa oba zadataka 1.1 i 1.2, koristeći obrnutu funkciju, koristeći deo kontekstnih reči izvan parova entiteta i koristeći metode ensemble kako bi poboljšali naše konačne predvidbe. Takođe smo testirali pažnju na osnovu okupljanja, povećanja uzoraka i povećanja podataka, ali niko nije poboljšao izvedbu. Naš model je postigao rank 6 od 28 (makro-srednji rezultat F1: 72,7) u podpitanju 1,1, i rank 4 od 20 (makro F1: 80,6) u podpitanju 1,2.', 'si': 'සෙම්වෙල් 2018 කාර්ය 7 කාර්යාලය සම්බන්ධ විදියට පද්ධතියක් හදන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ වර්ගයක් හදන්න පුළුවන් ව අපි පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණ 3ක් පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ: ලිනියර් විශේෂකය, ලොකු කොට්ටර්ම් මතකය (LSTM) මතකය, සහ ස අන්තිමේදි, CNN මොඩල් ප්\u200dරවේශයේ විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂය කරලා තියෙනවා, ඉතින් අපි අන්තිම ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා මේ මො අපි වැනිලා CNN වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ACL ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් කොර්ප අපි අවධානය පරීක්ෂා කරලා පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ පුළුවන්, සැම්පල් කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒත් දත්ත වැ අපේ මොඩේල් එකෙන් 28 වලින් 6 පැත්ත (මැක්රෝවාර්ථා F1-ප්\u200dරමාණය 72.7) පැත්ත 1.1 වලින් 1.1 වලින් 4 පැත්ත (මැක්රෝව F1: 80.6 වලින් 1.2 වලින් 4 ප', 'sv': 'SemEval 2018 Uppgift 7 gav deltagarna i uppdrag att bygga ett system för att klassificera två entiteter inom en mening i en av de 6 möjliga relationstyperna. Vi testade 3 klasser av modeller: Linjära klassificerare, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) modeller och Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) modeller. I slutändan visade CNN modellklassen sig mest presterande, så vi specialiserade oss på denna modell för våra slutliga inlämningar. Vi förbättrade prestandan bortom en vanilj CNN genom att inkludera en variant av negativ sampling, använda anpassade ord inbäddade över en korpus av ACL artiklar, träna över corpora av båda uppgifterna 1.1 och 1.2, använda omvänd funktion, använda delar av kontextord bortom entitetsparen och använda ensemblemetoder för att förbättra våra slutliga förutsägelser. Vi testade även uppmärksamhetsbaserad pooling, up-sampling och dataökning, men ingen förbättrade prestanda. Vår modell uppnådde rank 6 av 28 (makro-genomsnittlig F1-poäng: 72,7) i subaktivitet 1.1, och rank 4 av 20 (makro F1: 80,6) i subaktivitet 1.2.', 'ta': 'SemEval 2018 பணி 7 பங்குபவர்கள் செய்து ஒரு வாக்கியத்தில் இரண்டு பொருள்களை வகைப்படுத்த ஒரு வாக்கியத்தில் ஒரு 6 சாத்தியமான இணைப்பு வகை நாம் மூன்று வகுப்பு மாதிரிகளை சோதித்தோம்: கோடு வகுப்பாளர்கள், நீண்ட சிறிய முறை நினைவகம் (LSTM) மாதிரிகள், மற்றும் தொடர்ந்து நெருவல் ப Ultimately, the CNN model class proved most performant, so we specialized to this model for our final submissions.  நாங்கள் வெற்று சிஎன் என்னை விட செயல்பாட்டை மேல் மேம்படுத்தினோம், தனிப்பயன் சொல்லு மாற்றங்களை பயன்படுத்தி ACL கட்டுரைகளின் கட்டுரைகள் மேல் கற்றுக் கொண்டு, செயல்கள் 1. 1 மற்றும் 1. 2, மீண்டும் பணிகள நாம் மேலும் கவனத்தை சோதித்தோம் பாடல், மேம்மாதிரி மற்றும் தரவு அதிகரிப்பு, ஆனால் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு  எங்கள் மாதிரி 28 ல் இருந்து 6 வரிசையை அடைந்தது (மேக்ரோ சராசரி F1- score: 72. 7) துணை பணியில் 1. 1, மற்றும் 20 ல் நிலை 4 (macro F1: 80. 6) துணை பணியில் 1. 2.', 'ur': 'SemEval 2018 Task 7 task participants to build a system to classify two entities in a sentence into one of the six possible relation types. ہم نے تین کلاس موڈل کی آزمائش کی: لینیر کلاسپیر، لانگ کوٹ ٹر میمور (LSTM) موڈل، اور کنویرول نیورال نیٹ ورک (CNN) موڈل. بالآخر، سی ان کے ماڈل کلاس نے بہت زیادہ عمل کرنے والے ثابت کی، سو ہم نے اس مدل کے لئے اپنی آخری اطلاعات کے لئے مخصوص کیا۔ ہم نے وینلیا سی ان کے علاوہ ایک منفی نمپلینگ کے متغیر کے ذریعہ عملکرد کو بہتر کر دیا، ACL لکھائیوں کی کورپوس کے ذریعہ سیکھا گیا ہے، 1.1 اور 1.2 کی کورپور پر آموزش کی، سرپیچی فرصت کے مطابق، ایک ٹینٹی جوڑوں کے غیر کنٹیکس لکھائی کا ایک حصہ استعمال کرتا ہے اور ہماری آخری پیش بی ہم نے اپنا ذهن پولینگ، اپنا نمونہ اضافہ کرنے اور ڈیٹا اضافہ کرنے کی آزمائش کی، لیکن کوئی اضافہ نہیں کی۔ ہماری مدل 28 میں سے 6 درجے پہنچ گئے (مکرو متوسط F1-اسکور: 72.7) 1.1 مضبط میں اور 20 میں سے 4 درجے (مکرو F1: 80.6) 1.2 مضبط میں۔', 'so': 'SemEval 2018 Shaqada 7 waxaa shaqaynayay kuwa ka qayb gala inay dhisaan nidaam si ay u kala qeybeeyaan labo jidh oo ka mid ah noocyada xiriirka suurtagalka ah. Waxaan imtixaannay 3 fasalka modelalka: Linear-classifiers, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) models, iyo samooyin ku saabsan shabakadda Neural (CNN). Ultimately, the CNN model class proved most performant, so we specialized to this model for our final submissions.  Dhaqdhaqaaqa ka hormarinay CNN waxyaabaha aan waxtar lahayn waxaa lagu qoray tusaale noocyo kala duduwan, isticmaalka hadalka caadooyinka ah ee uu ka baray qoraalka macluumaadka ACL, waxbarashada ku saabsan shirkadaha labadooda shaqaalaha ah 1.1 iyo 1.2, isticmaalka dib loo beddelay hadal ka sokow sameynta labada labood iyo isticmaalka habboon si uu u hagaajiyo horumarinta ugu dambeeya. Sidoo kale waxaan imtixaannay daryeelka, sameynta sameynta iyo kordhiska macluumaadka, laakiin shaqeynta horumarinta ma leh. Tusaalkayagii wuxuu gaadhay fasalka 6 ka mid ah 28 (macro-average F1: 72.7) oo sameynta 1.1, wuxuuna ka dhigay 4 sano 20 (macro F1: 80.6) oo subaxda 1.2.', 'uz': "Name We tested 3 classes of models: Linear classifiers, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) models, and Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) models.  Natijada, CNN model sinfi ko'proq ishlab chiqaradi, shunday qilib biz oxirgi imkoniyatlarimiz uchun bu modelga tayyorlik. Biz shaxsiy CNN'dan ortiq ishni bajaramiz, qanday misol bilan boshqa so'zlarni o'rganish mumkin. Boshqa so'zlarni ACL maqolalaridan foydalanish mumkin, xabarlarning 1.1 va 1.2 tashkilotlarini o'rganish mumkin, taʼminlovchi imkoniyatlarni ishlatish imkoniyatlaridan foydalanish mumkin, obʼekt qo'llangan soʻzlardan bir qismdan foydalanish va bizning ox Biz shunday paytda tadbirlik asosida o'xshash, samol va maʼlumot yozib qo'shishni sinab ko'rsatdik, ammo o o'zgarishga yetardi. Bizning modelimiz 28 dan 6 darajaga (makro- o'rtacha F1- darajaga: 72. 7) sub- vazifa 1. 1 da 20 dan 4 darajaga (makro F1: 80. 6) bir vazifa 1. 2.", 'vi': 'Ủy ban nhiệm vụ 7 của SemEvil có nhiệm vụ của những người có nhiệm vụ tạo ra một hệ thống để phân loại hai thực thể trong một câu vào một trong 6 những kiểu liên hệ có thể. Chúng tôi đã thử ba lớp mô hình: mức phân loại tuyến, mô hình Ký Ức Dài Hạn (LSTM) và mô hình thần kinh Thuyết phục (CNN). Cuối cùng, hạng người mẫu của CNN đã được trình diễn nhiều nhất, vì vậy chúng tôi đã chuyên môn cho phiên bản cuối cùng này. Chúng tôi nâng cao khả năng hơn cả một CNN với vani bằng cách bao gồm một biến thể của việc lấy mẫu âm, sử dụng những từ điển được học trên tập hợp các bài bản ACL, huấn luyện trên cơ thể của cả hai công việc 1.1 và 1.2, sử dụng tính năng đảo ngược, sử dụng một phần của ngữ cảnh nằm ngoài mỗi cặp thực thể và dùng các phương pháp kết hợp để cải thiện dự đoán cuối cùng. Chúng tôi cũng đã thử nghiệm việc tập trung dựa trên hợp, tuyển chọn và gia tăng dữ liệu, nhưng không có hiệu quả tốt. Mẫu của chúng ta đạt được cấp 6 ra khỏi 28 (tính tổng số F1-số: 72.7) trong phần dưới 1.1, và cấp 4 trên 20 (chế độ F1: 80.6) trong phần phụ 1.2.', 'bg': 'Задача 7 възложи на участниците да изградят система за класифициране на две единици в рамките на изречение в един от 6 възможни типа релации. Тествахме 3 класа модели: линейни класификатори, модели за дълга краткосрочна памет (ЛСТМ) и модели за конвелуционална неврална мрежа (CNN). В крайна сметка класа модел на CNN се оказа най-производителен, така че ние се специализирахме в този модел за нашите крайни предложения. Подобрихме производителността отвъд ваниловия чрез включване на вариант на отрицателна извадка, използване на персонализирани вграждания на думи, научени в корпус от статии от АКЛ, обучение върху корпуси от задачи 1.1 и 1.2, използване на обратна функция, използване на част от контекстни думи извън двойките обекти и използване на ансамбълни методи за подобряване на окончателните ни прогнози. Също така тествахме обединяване на вниманието, вземане на проби и увеличаване на данните, но не подобрихме ефективността. Нашият модел постигна ранг 6 от 28 (макросреднен резултат: 72.7) в подзадача 1.1 и ранг 4 от 20 (макросреднен резултат: 80.6) в подзадача 1.2.', 'nl': 'SemEval 2018 Taak 7 gaf deelnemers de opdracht om een systeem te bouwen om twee entiteiten binnen een zin te classificeren in een van de zes mogelijke relatietypen. We hebben drie klassen van modellen getest: Lineaire classificatoren, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) modellen en Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) modellen. Uiteindelijk bleek de CNN modelklasse het meest performant, dus specialiseerden we ons op dit model voor onze uiteindelijke inzendingen. We hebben de prestaties verder verbeterd dan een vanille CNN door een variant van negatieve sampling op te nemen, aangepaste woordinsluitingen te gebruiken die zijn geleerd over een corpus van ACL-artikelen, training over corpora van beide taken 1.1 en 1.2, gebruik te maken van omgekeerde functie, gebruik te maken van een deel van contextwoorden buiten de entiteitsparen en ensemble methoden om onze uiteindelijke voorspellingen te verbeteren. We hebben ook aandacht gebaseerde pooling, up-sampling en data augmentatie getest, maar geen verbeterde prestaties. Ons model behaalde rang 6 van 28 (macro-gemiddelde F1-score: 72.7) in subtaak 1.1, en rang 4 van 20 (macro F1: 80.6) in subtaak 1.2.', 'hr': 'SemEval 2018. zadatak 7 zadužen sudionici izgraditi sustav za klasifikaciju dva entiteta unutar rečenice u jednu od 6 mogućih vrsta odnosa. Testirali smo 3 klase modela: linijske klasifikatore, dugoročne uspomene (LSTM) modele i konvolucionalne neurone mreže (CNN) modele. Na kraju, CNN model klasa je dokazala najizvršniji, pa smo specijalizirali ovaj model za naše posljednje podatke. Poboljšali smo performancu izvan vanilla CNN-a uključujući variant negativnog uzoraka, koristeći obične riječi uključene preko korpusa članaka ACL-a, obuku preko korpusa oba zadatka 1.1 i 1.2, koristeći obrnutu funkciju, koristeći dio kontekstnih riječi izvan parova entiteta i koristeći metode ensemble kako bi poboljšali naše konačne predviđanje. Također smo testirali pažnju na osnovu okupljanja, povećanja uzoraka i povećanja podataka, ali niko nije poboljšao učinku. Naš model je postigao rank 6 od 28 (makro-srednji F1 rezultat: 72,7) u podpitanju 1,1 i rank 4 od 20 (makro F1: 80,6) u podpitanju 1,2.', 'da': 'SemEval 2018 Opgave 7 gav deltagerne til opgave at opbygge et system til at klassificere to enheder i en sætning i en af de 6 mulige relationstyper. Vi testede 3 klasser af modeller: Lineære klassificeringer, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) modeller og Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) modeller. I sidste ende viste CNN modelklassen sig at være mest performant, så vi specialiserede os til denne model til vores endelige indsendelser. Vi forbedrede ydeevnen ud over en vanilla CNN ved at inkludere en variant af negativ sampling, ved hjælp af brugerdefinerede ord indlejringer lært over et korpus af ACL artikler, træning over corpora af begge opgaver 1.1 og 1.2, ved hjælp af omvendt funktion, ved hjælp af en del af kontekst ord ud over entitetsparrene og ved hjælp af ensemble metoder til at forbedre vores endelige forudsigelser. Vi testede også opmærksomhedsbaseret pooling, up-sampling og dataforøgelse, men ingen forbedrede ydeevnen. Vores model opnåede rang 6 ud af 28 (makro-gennemsnit F1-score: 72,7) i subaktivitet 1.1 og rang 4 ud af 20 (makro F1: 80,6) i subaktivitet 1.2.', 'de': 'SemEval 2018 Task 7 beauftragte die Teilnehmer, ein System zu entwickeln, um zwei Entitäten innerhalb eines Satzes in einen der sechs möglichen Beziehungstypen einzuordnen. Wir haben drei Klassen von Modellen getestet: Lineare Klassifikatoren, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) Modelle und Convolutional Neural Network (CNN)-Modelle. Letztendlich erwies sich die CNN-Modellklasse als leistungsstärkste, so dass wir uns für unsere endgültigen Einreichungen auf dieses Modell spezialisiert haben. Wir haben die Leistung über ein Vanille-CNN hinaus verbessert, indem wir eine Variante des negativen Samplings einbetten, benutzerdefinierte Worteinbettungen verwenden, die über einen Korpus von ACL-Artikeln gelernt wurden, über Korpora beider Aufgaben 1.1 und 1.2 trainieren, umgekehrte Funktion verwenden, einen Teil von Kontextwörtern außerhalb der Entitätspaare verwenden und Ensemble-Methoden verwenden, um unsere endgültigen Vorhersagen zu verbessern. Wir testeten auch aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes Pooling, Up-Sampling und Data Augmentation, aber keine verbesserte Leistung. Unser Modell erreichte Rang 6 von 28 (makrodurchschnittlicher F1-Score: 72.7) in Teilaufgabe 1.1 und Rang 4 von 20 (Makro F1: 80.6) in Teilaufgabe 1.2.', 'ko': 'SemEval 2018 임무 7은 참여자에게 문장의 두 실체를 6가지 가능한 관계 유형 중 하나로 나누는 시스템을 만들도록 했다.우리는 선형 분류기, 장단시 기억 (LSTM) 모델, 권적신경망 (CNN) 모델 세 가지를 테스트했다.결국 CNN 모형 과정이 가장 뛰어나다는 것이 증명되었기 때문에 우리는 이 모형을 전문적으로 연구하여 최종적으로 제출할 준비를 하였다.우리는 ACL 기사 자료 라이브러리에서 학습한 사용자 정의 단어 삽입, 작업 1.1과 1.2의 자료 라이브러리에서 훈련을 하고 역방향 특징을 사용하며 실체 대 이외의 일부 상하문 단어를 사용하고 집적 방법을 사용하여 우리의 최종 예측을 개선하는 등 일반 CNN 이외의 성능을 향상시켰다.우리는 또한 주의력을 바탕으로 하는 공유, 샘플링, 데이터 확장도 테스트했지만, 성능 개선은 없었다.우리의 모델은 하위 퀘스트 1.1에서 28점 중 6위(거시적 평균 F1점수: 72.7), 하위 퀘스트 1.2에서 20점 중 4위(거시적 F1점수: 80.6)를 차지했다.', 'id': 'SemEval 2018 Tugas 7 menyuruh peserta untuk membangun sistem untuk mengklasifikasi dua entitas dalam kalimat menjadi salah satu dari 6 tipe hubungan yang mungkin. We tested 3 classes of models: Linear classifiers, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) models, and Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) models.  Akhirnya, kelas model CNN terbukti paling performan, jadi kami spesialisasi untuk model ini untuk pengiriman akhir kami. Kami meningkatkan prestasi di luar CNN vanilla dengan termasuk varian dari sampel negatif, menggunakan pembangunan kata suatu belajar melalui korpus artikel ACL, latihan melalui korpora dari kedua tugas 1.1 dan 1.2, menggunakan fitur terbalik, menggunakan bagian dari kata konteks di luar pasangan entitas dan menggunakan metode ensemble untuk meningkatkan prediksi akhir kita. Kami juga menguji pengumpulan perhatian berdasarkan pemilihan sampel, dan peningkatan data, tapi tidak ada prestasi yang lebih baik. Model kami mencapai rangka 6 dari 28 (makro-rata-rata F1-skor: 72,7) dalam subtask 1.1, dan rangka 4 dari 20 (makro F1: 80,6) dalam subtask 1.2.', 'fa': 'پایین اول ۲۰۱۸ تابع ۷ شرکت کننده برای ساختن یک سیستم برای کلاس دو واحد در یک جمله به یکی از ۶ نوع رابطه ممکن است. ما سه کلاس مدل را آزمایش کردیم: کلاسیک\u200cهای خط، مدل\u200cهای حافظه\u200cی کوتاه\u200cTerm (LSTM) و مدل\u200cهای شبکه عصبی (CNN) معمولی. بالاخره کلاس مدل سین\u200cان بیشترین اجرا را ثابت کرد، بنابراین ما برای این مدل تخصص کردیم برای اخرین تحویل\u200cهای ما. ما عملکرد فراتر از یک سانیل وینیلا را توسط تغییری از نمونه\u200cهای منفی، با استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای منفی بر روی یک قالب مقاله\u200cهای ACL یاد گرفتیم، آموزش بر جسد هر دو کار ۱.۱ و ۱.۲، استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای منفی، استفاده از بخشی از کلمه\u200cهای منفی فراتر از جسد\u200cهای ما همچنین توجه بر اساس جمع کردن، نمونه\u200cهای بالا و افزایش داده\u200cها را آزمایش کردیم، ولی عملکرد بهتر نیست. مدل ما درجه 6 از 28 (نمونه F1 متوسط با مکرو: 72.7) در پاسپرس 1.1 و درجه 4 از 20 (مکرو F1: 80.6) در پاسپرس 1.2 رسید.', 'sw': 'SemEval 2018, wafanyakazi 7 walifanya kazi washiriki kutengeneza mfumo wa kutangaza vitu viwili ndani ya hukumu moja ya aina 6 zinazowezekana ya mahusiano. Tulijaribu darasa tatu la mifano: wataalamu wa Linear, Mfano wa muda mrefu wa muda mrefu (LSTM), na mifano ya Mtandao wa Neural (CNN) yenye kujitolea. Hatimaye, darasa la model la CNN lilionyesha kuwa ni mchezo mkubwa zaidi, kwa hiyo tulijitegemea kwenye mtindo huu kwa ajili ya ujumbe wetu wa mwisho. Tuliaboresha utendaji zaidi ya CNN wa bure kwa kutumia tofauti ya sampuli hasi, kwa kutumia maneno ya kawaida yaliyojifunza juu ya makala za ACL, mafunzo ya kazi zote za kawaida 1.1 na 1.2, kwa kutumia sehemu ya maneno yanayobadilika zaidi ya wanandoa na kutumia mbinu za kuboresha utabiri wetu wa mwisho. Pia tulijaribu kuchunguza maoni, sampuli ya upatikanaji, na kuongeza taarifa, lakini hakuna utendaji ulioboreshwa. Mfano wetu ulipata nafasi 6 kati ya 28 (kiwango cha wastani wa F1: 72.7) katika jukumu la 1.1, na daraja 4 kati ya 20 (makro F1: 80.6) katika jukumu la 1.2.', 'tr': "2018 Görev 7 täblisasy mümkin baglanyşyklaryň birine bir syýasy bejermek üçin bir sistemi gurlamak üçin gören iştirakçiler. Biz 3 sany nusga hatlary bardyk: hatlary klasifikatçy, Uzun Term Hatlary (LSTM) modelleri, we Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) modelleri. Iň so ňunda CNN nusga nusgasy iň kän iş bardyr, şonuň üçin biz iň soňky görkezmelerimiz üçin bu nusga specialis etdik. Vanila CNN'yň öňünden täsirini gowuraşdyryp, ACL maýyllarynyň köpüsi üstünde öwrenmek üçin köpüsi sözlerini ulanyp, 1.1 we 1.2 işiň köpüsi üstünde öwrenmek üçin tertiblenen sözlerini ulanyp, birem çiftleriň öňünden daşarylan kontekst sözlerini ulanyp we soňky öňümizden gelişmek üçin ensemble yöntem Biz hem üns çykmak, örnekler taýýarlamak we maglumaty üýtgetmek üçin synanyşdyrdyk ýöne hiç hili gowurak etmäni ýok. Biziň nusgymyz 28-den (makro ortalamaly F1-अ: 72.7) subtask 1.1-de, we 20-den 4-de (makro F1: 80.6) subtask 1.2-de tapylýar.", 'am': 'ስምEval 2018 ስራ 7 ተጋሪዎችን ከ6 በተቻለው ግንኙነት ዓይነት ውስጥ ሁለት አካላትን ለመግለጽ የስርዓት ውይይት ለማግኘት ሥርዓት ያደርጉታል፡፡ የ3 ደረጃዎች ምሳሌዎችን ሞከርን: Linear classifiers, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) models, Convolution Neural Network (CNN) models. በመጨረሻውም የCNN ሞዴል ክፍል አብዛኛውን ፈተና እንደሆነ ለዚህ ሞዴል ለፍጻሜ ልግስታችን ለፍጥረት ጠቅመን ነበር፡፡ ከዋናው CNN በላይ የተለየውን የነፃ ምሳሌ እና በአካባቢ ቃላት አካላት ላይ በተማረን፣ በኮርፖርት ላይ 1.1 እና 1.2 በማስተካከል፣ በተመለከተው የሥርዓት አካባቢ እና ከሥርዓት ሌላ ቃላትን በመጠቀም እና የፍጻሜውን ቅድሚያ እንዲያበጅል በመጠቀም እና የመጨረሻ ውይይይቶችን በመጠቀም በመጠቀም በተለየን ቃላት አካባቢ እና በጥ We also tested attention based pooling, up-sampling, and data augmentation, but none improved performance.  ምሳሌያችን ከ28 ደረጃዎች 6 (ማክሮ-average F1-score: 72.7) በመስኮት 1.1 እና ከ20 (ማክሮ F1: 80.6) ደረጃውን 1.2 ውስጥ ደረጃ 4 አግኝቷል፡፡', 'af': "SemEval 2018 Taak 7 gedoende deelnimmers om 'n stelsel te bou om twee entiteite binne 'n seting in een van die 6 moontlike verwanting tipes te klassifiseer. Ons het 3 klasse van modele toets: Lineêre klassifiseerders, Long- Term Geheue (LSTM) modele en Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) modele. Eindelik het die CNN-model klas mees uitvoerder bevestig, sodat ons spesialiseer het vir hierdie model vir ons eindelike onderskrifte. Ons het die prestasie buite 'n vanilla CNN verbeter deur insluitering van 'n variante van negatiewe versameling, gebruik pasmaak woord inbettings geleer oor 'n korpus van ACL-artikels, onderwerp oor korpora van beide werke 1.1 en 1.2, gebruik omgekeerde funksie, gebruik deel van kontekswoorde buite die entiteite paar en gebruik ensemble metodes om ons finale voorskou te verbeter Ons het ook aandag gebaseerde pooling, opversameling en data vergroot toets, maar geen verbeterde prestasie nie. Ons model het rank 6 uit 28 (makro- gemiddelde F1- telling: 72. 7) in subtfraag 1. 1, en rank 4 uit 20 (makro F1: 80. 6) in subtfraag 1. 2.", 'sq': 'SemEval 2018 Task 7 detyroi pjesëmarrësit të ndërtojnë një sistem për të klasifikuar dy njësi brenda një fjalimi në një nga 6 llojet e lidhjeve të mundshme. Kemi testuar 3 klasa modelesh: klasifikuesit linearë, modelet e kujtesës afat-shkurtër (LSTM) dhe modelet e rrjetit nervor konvolutiv (CNN). Në fund, klasa e modelit CNN u tregua më e performant ë, kështu që ne u specializuam në këtë model për paraqitjet tona përfundimtare. Ne përmirësuam performancën përtej një vanille CNN duke përfshirë një variant të mbikqyrjes negative, duke përdorur përmbajtje të fjalëve të personalizuara të mësuara mbi një korpus artikujsh ACL, duke trajnuar mbi korprën e të dyve detyrave 1.1 dhe 1.2, duke përdorur karakteristikë të ndryshme, duke përdorur pjesë të fjalëve të kontekstit përtej palëve të njësisë dhe duke përdorur metodat e mbledhjes për të përmir Kemi testuar gjithashtu mbledhjen e vëmendjes bazuar në mbledhjen e vëmendjes, mbikqyrjen e mostrave dhe rritjen e të dhënave, por asnjë rezultat i përmirësuar. Modeli ynë arriti rendin 6 nga 28 (makro-mesatarisht rezultati F1: 72.7) në nënpyetjen 1.1 dhe rendin 4 nga 20 (makro F1: 80.6) në nënpyetjen 1.2.', 'az': "SemEval 2018 Task 7 iştirakçıları, cümlənin içində iki nəfəri seçmək üçün bir sistem inşa etmək üçün 6 mümkün ilişki türünün birinə istifadə edilmişdir. Biz 3 dəstə modellərin sınaqlarını çəkdik: çizgi klasifikatçılar, Uzun Qısqa Term Memory (LSTM) modelləri və Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) modelləri. Sonunda CNN modeli sınıfı çox performans göstərildi, bu yüzden biz bu modeli son göndərmək üçün təhsil etdik. Sonrakı tədbirlərimizi yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün qeyri-müxtəlif sözlərin bir dəyişikliyini istifadə etmək üçün vanilla CNN'nin öyrənməsini daha yaxşılaşdırdıq. Biz də məlumatları birləşdirmək, çəkilmək və məlumatları artırmaq üçün təsirlərini imtahana çəkdik, amma heç bir xeyirli performans yoxdur. Bizim modelimiz 28-dən 6 dərəcə qəbul etdi (makro-ortalama F1-score: 72.7) 1.1 dərəcədə 1.1 dərəcədə və 20-dən 4 dərəcə qəbul etdi (makro F1: 80.6) 1.2 dərəcədə 1.2 dərəcədə.", 'bn': 'SemEval 2018 Task 7 tasked participants to build a system to classify two entities within a sentence into one of the 6 possible relation types.  আমরা তিন শ্রেণীর মডেল পরীক্ষা করেছি: লাইনের শ্রেণীবিভাগ, লম্বা সংক্ষিপ্ত টার্ম ম মেমরি (এলসিএম) মডেল এবং কনভোলিয়েশনাল নিউরাল নেটওয় অবশেষে, সিএনএন মডেল ক্লাস সবচেয়ে প্রমাণিত হয়েছে, তাই আমরা এই মডেলের জন্য বিশেষ করেছি আমাদের শেষ প্রশাসনের জন্য। আমরা একটি বাজে সিএনএনের বাইরে কার্যক্রম উন্নত করেছি, যার মধ্যে নেতিবাচক উদাহরণ রয়েছে, স্বনির্বাচিত শব্দ ব্যবহার করে এসিএল প্রবন্ধের কোর্পাসে শিখেছে, ১. ১ এবং ১. এছাড়াও আমরা মনোযোগ প্রদান করি ভিত্তিক পুলিং, উদাহরণ এবং তথ্য বাড়ানোর পরীক্ষা করি, কিন্তু কোন উন্নত কার্যক্রম নেই। আমাদের মডেল ২৮ থেকে ৬ স্তর পৌঁছেছে (ম্যাক্রো গড়ে এফ১ স্কোর: ৭২. ৭) সাববাজ ১. ১ এবং ২০ থেকে ৪ স্তর (ম্যাক্রো এফ১: ৮০. ৬) সাব্বাক্সে', 'bs': 'SemEval 2018. zadatak 7 zadužen sudionici da izgrade sistem za klasifikaciju dva entiteta u jednoj od 6 mogućih vrsta odnosa. Testirali smo 3 klase modela: linijske klasifikatore, dugoročne memorije (LSTM) modele i konvolucionalne neurone mreže (CNN) modele. Na kraju, CNN model klasa je dokazala najizvršniji, pa smo specijalizovali ovaj model za naše poslednje podatke. Poboljšali smo izvan vanile CNN-a, uključujući variant negativnog uzoraka, koristeći obične rečenice koje su učene preko korpusa ACL-a, obuku preko korpusa oba zadataka 1.1 i 1.2, koristeći obrnutu funkciju, koristeći dio kontekstnih riječi izvan parova entiteta i koristeći metode ensemble za poboljšavanje našeg konačnog predviđanja. Također smo testirali pažnju na osnovu okupljanja, povećanja uzorka i povećanja podataka, ali niko nije poboljšao izvođenje. Naš model je postigao rank 6 od 28 (makro-srednji F1 rezultat: 72,7) u podpitanju 1,1, i rank 4 od 20 (makro F1: 80,6) u podpitanju 1,2.', 'hy': "ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի 7-րդ հանձնարարությունը մասնակիցներին առաջարկեց կառուցել մի համակարգ, որպեսզի դասակարգեն նախադասության մեջ երկու միավոր 6 հնարավոր հարաբերություններից մեկի մեջ: Մենք փորձարկեցինք 3 մոդելների դասակարգեր' գծային դասակարգեր, երկար կարճ ժամանակահատվածի հիշողության (LSMT) մոդելներ, և հակադարձ նյարդային ցանցի (CNN) մոդելներ: Վերջ ի վերջո, CNN մոդելների դասը պարզվեց ամենաարդյունավետ, ուստի մենք մասնագիտակցեցինք այս մոդելին մեր վերջնական ներկայացումների համար: Մենք բարելավեցինք վանիլայի CNN-ից դուրս գտնվող արտադրողությունը, ներառելով բացասական նմուշների տարբերակը, օգտագործելով ACL-ի հոդվածների կորպոսի վրա սովորված հատուկ բառերի ներդրումներ, ուսուցանելով երկու խնդիրների 1.1 և 1.2 կորպրոսի վրա, օգտագործելով հակառակ հատկություն, օգտագործելով էության Մենք նաև փորձեցինք ուշադրության վրա հիմնված հավաքածությունը, նմուշներ վերցնելը և տվյալների աճը, բայց ոչ մի բարելավված արդյունք չկա: Մեր մոդելը հասավ 28-ից 6-ին (մակրոմիջին F1-գնահատականը 72.7) 1.1 ենթահարցում, իսկ 20-ից 4-ին (մակրոմիջին F1-ը 80.6) 1.2 ենթահարցում:", 'ca': "SemEval 2018 La tasca 7 va tascar als participants a construir un sistema per classificar dues entitats dins una frase en un dels 6 tipus de relacions possibles. Vam provar 3 classes de models: classificadors linears, models de memòria a curt termini (LSTM) i models de Rede Neural Convolutiva (CNN). Finalment, la classe de model CNN va ser més performant, així que ens vam especialitzar en aquest model per les nostres presentacions finals. Vam millorar el rendiment més enllà d'un CNN de vànil inclouent una variant de mostratge negatiu, utilitzant integracions de paraules personalitzades aprenguts sobre un cos d'articles ACL, entrenament sobre corpora de les dues tasques 1.1 i 1.2, utilitzant característiques inverses, utilitzant part de paraules contextuals més enllà dels parells d'entitats i utilitzant mètodes conjunts per millorar les nostres previsions finals. També vam provar la agrupació, el recolliment de mostres i el augment de les dades basades en l'atenció, però cap millor rendiment. El nostre model va aconseguir un rang6 de 28 (puntuació F1 de macromitjana: 72,7) en la subpregunta 1.1, i un rang4 de 20 (macro F1: 80,6) en la subpregunta 1.2.", 'cs': 'SemEval 2018 Úkol 7 pověřil účastníkům vytvořit systém pro klasifikaci dvou entit ve větě do jednoho ze šesti možných typů vztahů. Testovali jsme třídy modelů: lineární klasifikátory, LSTM modely a CNN modely. Nakonec se ukázala nejvýkonnější třída modelů CNN, takže jsme se specializovali na tento model pro naše závěrečné podání. Zlepšili jsme výkon nad rámec vanilkové CNN zahrnutím varianty negativního vzorkování, použitím vlastních vložení slov naučených přes korpus článků ACL, školením nad korpusy obou úkolů 1.1 a 1.2, použitím reverzní funkce, použitím části kontextových slov mimo páry entit a použitím souborových metod ke zlepšení našich konečných predikcí. Testovali jsme také sdílení založené na pozornosti, vzorkování a rozšíření dat, ale žádný z nich nezlepšil výkon. Náš model dosáhl pořadí 6 z 28 (makro-průměrné F1-skóre: 72.7) v podúkolu 1.1 a pořadí 4 z 20 (makro F1: 80.6) v podúkolu 1.2.', 'et': 'SemEval 2018 Ülesanne 7 andis osalejatele ülesande luua süsteem kahe üksuse klassifitseerimiseks lauses ühte kuuest võimalikust seostüübist. Testisime kolme mudeli klassi: lineaarsed klassifikaatorid, pikaajalise lühiajalise mälu mudelid ja konvolutsioonilise neurovõrgu mudelid. Lõppkokkuvõttes osutus CNN mudeliklass kõige tulemuslikumaks, nii et me spetsialiseerusime sellele mudelile oma lõplike esituste jaoks. Me parandasime jõudlust kaugemale kui vanilla CNN, lisades negatiivse proovivõtu variandi, kasutades kohandatud sõnade manustamist ACL artiklite korpuses, koolitades korpuseid mõlemas ülesandes 1.1 ja 1.2, kasutades pööratud funktsiooni, kasutades osa kontekstisõnadest väljaspool olemuspaare ja kasutades ansambli meetodeid lõplike prognooside parandamiseks. Testisime ka tähelepanu põhinevat koondamist, proovivõtmist ja andmete suurendamist, kuid ükski ei parandanud jõudlust. Meie mudel saavutas alaülesandes 1.1 6. koha 28-st (makrokeskmine F1-skoor: 72,7) ja alaülesandes 1.2 4. koha 20-st (makro F1: 80,6).', 'fi': 'SemEval 2018 Tehtävä 7 antoi osallistujille tehtäväksi rakentaa järjestelmä, jolla kaksi lauseessa olevaa entiteettiä luokitellaan yhteen kuudesta mahdollisesta suhdetyypistä. Testasimme kolmea malliluokkaa: lineaarisia luokittelijoita, pitkäkestoisia lyhyen aikavälin muistimalleja (LSTM) ja konvolutional neural network (CNN). Lopulta CNN-malliluokka osoittautui suorituskykyisimmäksi, joten erikoistuimme tähän malliin lopullisia esityksiä varten. Paransimme suorituskykyä vaniljan CNN:n lisäksi sisällyttämällä negatiivisen näytteenoton variantin, käyttämällä mukautettuja sanaupotuksia, jotka on opittu ACL-artikkeleiden korpusessa, kouluttamalla korpusia sekä tehtävissä 1.1 että 1.2, käyttämällä käänteisominaisuutta, käyttämällä osaa kontekstisanoista entiteettiparien ulkopuolella ja käyttämällä ensemble-menetelmiä lopullisten ennusteiden parantamiseksi. Testasimme myös huomiota perustuvaa yhdistämistä, näytteenottoa ja datan lisäämistä, mutta mikään ei parantanut suorituskykyä. Mallimme saavutti sijalle 6 alatehtävässä 1.1 (makrokeskiarvo F1: 72,7) 28:sta ja sijalle 4 alatehtävässä 1.2 (makrokeskiarvo F1: 80,6).', 'sk': 'SemEval 2018 Naloga 7 je udeležencem naložila, da zgradijo sistem za razvrstitev dveh subjektov znotraj stavka v eno od 6 možnih vrst relacij. Preizkusili smo tri razrede modelov: linearne klasifikatorje, modele dolgoročnega kratkoročnega pomnilnika (LSTM) in modele konvolucijskega živčnega omrežja (CNN). Nazadnje se je razred modelov CNN izkazal za najbolj uspešnega, zato smo se specializirali za ta model za naše končne prispevke. Izboljšali smo zmogljivost nad vanilijo CNN z vključitvijo različice negativnega vzorčenja, z uporabo prilagojenih besednih vdelav, pridobljenih v korpusu ACL člankov, usposabljanjem nad korpusi obeh nalog 1.1 in 1.2, uporabo obrnjene funkcije, uporabo dela kontekstnih besed zunaj parov entitet in uporabo ansamblovih metod za izboljšanje končnih napovedi. Preizkusili smo tudi združevanje na osnovi pozornosti, vzorčenje in povečanje podatkov, vendar nobena izboljšala učinkovitost. Naš model je dosegel 6. mesto od 28 (makropovprečje F1: 72,7) v podopravilu 1.1 in 4. mesto od 20 (makro F1: 80,6) v podopravilu 1.2.', 'ha': "SemEV 2018 Taimar 7 na zama mãsu haɗi da shi dõmin su ƙiƙira wani na'ura wa tsari biyu cikin birane zuwa ɗayan nau'i na 6 masu yiwuwa. Mun jarraba darajõji uku na misalin ayuka: Shiryoyin darajõji cikin linjeri, masalluɗun Narrabi'a-Low Ga ƙarshe, kuren misalin CNN ya jarraba mafiya yawan aiki, sai muka ƙayyade wannan misalin zuwa ƙarami masu sallama. Mun kyautata wani aikin da ba da wani abu ba na taga CNN, ko kuma mun yi amfani da wasu misãlai masu negative, ko kuma mun yi amfani da shiryarwa masu amfani da shiryarwa masu ƙaranci na makampuni ya yi amfani da shi.1 da 1.2. Haƙĩƙa, Mun jarraba muhimmanci a kan basalin samfani, da samfanin data da za'a ƙara, kuma amma ba da sami mai kyau. MisalinMu ya isa daraja 6 daga 28 (macro-aged F1-score: 197.7) cikin aikin 1.1, kuma yana da daraja 4 daga 20 (macro F1: 80.6) cikin aikin 1.2.", 'he': 'SemEval 2018 משימה 7 הוציאה משתתפים לבנות מערכת כדי לקlassify שתי יחידות בתוך משפט לאחד מ-6 סוגי היחסים האפשריים. We tested 3 classes of models: Linear classifiers, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) models, and Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) models.  בסופו של דבר, שיעור מודל CNN הוכיח הכי מופיע, אז התמחנו למודל הזה לשלוחותינו האחרונות. שיתפרנו את ההופעה מעבר לנילה CNN בכך שכלול שונה של דגימות שליליות, בשימוש בתכניות מילים מתאימות ללמודים על קורפוס מאמרים ACL, אימונים על קורפורה של שני המשימות בדקנו גם התשובה מבוססת על ארכיב תשומת לב, חיפוש דגימות, ויותר נתונים, אבל אין ביצועים משתפרים. הדוגמא שלנו השיגה את רמה 6 מתוך 28 (נקודת F1 בממוצע מקרו: 72.7) בתת-שאלה 1.1, ורמה 4 מתוך 20 (מקרו F1: 80.6) בתת-שאלה 1.2.', 'jv': 'semi Awak dhéwé énester 3 Kelaser sampeyan model: LineType Murah, kelas nang model sing dadi, dadi, kita disebarke nggo model iki banget kanggo ngerasar dumadhi iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan YouTube luwih hayong, ingkang dipunangé sampling, ingkang perusahaan kelangan embedding ding kuwe nggawe barang nggawe barang manungé (cara-cara inggawe lan ingkang cara-cara ingkang 1.1 lan 1.2), iso nggawe cara-cara nggawe wajih dumadhil kuwe sampling, iso nggawe isih perusahaan kowe nggawe kuchayé supoyo nggawe dianggap Awak dhéwé éntuk ujian sing nggambar ditambah, akeh-sampling, lan pakan-pakan antaraning data, njuk kuwi wis ngerasakno sing bisa dianggap. Monday', 'bo': 'SemEval 2018 Task 7 tasked participants to build a system to classify two entities in a sentence into one of the 6 possible relation types. We tested 3 classes of models: Linear classifiers, Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) models, and Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) models. མཇུག་རྫོགས་ནི་ CNN མ་དབ We improved performance beyond a vanilla CNN by including a variant of negative sampling, using custom word embeddings learned over a corpus of ACL articles, training over corpora of both tasks 1.1 and 1.2, using reversed feature, using part of context words beyond the entity pairs and using ensemble methods to improve our final predictions. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་མཐུན་དང་། དཔེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་། ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ་བརྟག་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ ང་ཚོའི་མིག'}
{'en': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'fr': "Sirius-LTG-UIO au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Réseaux neuronaux convolutifs avec les chemins de dépendance les plus courts pour l'extraction et la classification de relations sémantiques dans les articles scientifiques", 'ar': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية ذات المسارات التبعية الأقصر لاستخراج العلاقات الدلالية وتصنيفها في الأوراق العلمية', 'pt': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Redes Neurais Convolucionais com Caminhos de Dependência Mais Curtos para Extração e Classificação de Relações Semânticas em Artigos Científicos', 'es': 'Sirius-LTG-UIO en SemEval-2018 Tarea 7: Redes neuronales convolucionales con las rutas de dependencia más cortas para la extracción y clasificación de relaciones semánticas en artículos científicos', 'zh': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at SemEval-2018 务7:科学论文语义取类者卷积神经网络有短长之径', 'ja': 'SIRIUS - LTG - UiO at SemEval -2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with shortest dependency paths for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'hi': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UIO पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 7: वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में शब्दार्थ संबंध निष्कर्षण और वर्गीकरण के लिए सबसे कम निर्भरता पथ के साथ Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO на SemEval-2018 Задача 7: Сверточные нейронные сети с кратчайшими путями зависимости для извлечения и классификации семантических отношений в научных работах', 'ga': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite leis na Conairí Spleáchais Is Giorra le haghaidh Eastóscadh agus Rangú Gaol Séimeantach i bPáipéir Eolaíoch', 'ka': 'SIRIUS', 'hu': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO a SemEval-2018 7. feladat: Konvolúciós neurális hálózatok a legrövidebb függőségi útvonalakkal a szemantikus kapcsolat kivonásához és osztályozásához tudományos dolgozatokban', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Σύλληλα Νευρικά Δίκτυα με συντομότερες διαδρομές εξάρτησης για την εξαγωγή και ταξινόμηση σημαντικών σχέσεων σε επιστημονικές εργασίες', 'it': "SIRIUS-LTG-UiO al SemEval-2018 Task 7: Reti Neurali Convoluzionali con percorsi di dipendenza più brevi per l'estrazione e la classificazione delle relazioni semantiche in articoli scientifici", 'kk': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification in Scientific Paper', 'lt': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO SemEval-2018 7 užduotis: konvoluciniai nerviniai tinklai su trumpiausiais priklausomybės keliais, kuriais siekiama ekstrahuoti ir klasifikuoti Semantinius santykius moksliniuose dokumentuose', 'mk': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO на SemEval-2018 задача 7: Конволуционални неврални мрежи со најкратки патишта за зависност за екстракција и класификација на семантичките односи во научните документи', 'ms': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Rangkaian Neural Convolutional dengan Laluan Kependekatan Terpendek untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Semantik dan Klasifikasi dalam Dokumen Saintifik', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7-ല്\u200d സിറിയസ്- LTG- UiO: സെമാന്റിക് വിലാസപുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഏറ്റവും ചെറുതായ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകളുമായി കോണ', 'mt': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7: Netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali b’Rotot l-iqsar ta’ Dipendenza għall-Estrazzjoni u l-Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Relazzjonijiet Semantiċi f’Dokumenti Xjentifiċi', 'mn': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'pl': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 7: Konwolucyjne sieci neuronowe z najkrótszymi ścieżkami zależności do ekstrakcji i klasyfikacji relacji semantycznych w pracach naukowych', 'no': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'ro': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 7: Rețele Neurale Convoluționale cu cele mai scurte căi de dependență pentru extragerea și clasificarea relațiilor semantice în lucrări științifice', 'si': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at semeval-2018 Job 7: ConVoltive neural Netwarks with Shortest Dependency paths for semantic Attitude Extraction and Classication in science papers', 'sr': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: Konvolucionalne neuronske mreže sa najkraćim putem zavisnosti za ekstrakciju semantičkih odnosa i klasifikaciju u naučnim papirima', 'sv': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Konvulutionella neurala nätverk med kortaste beroendevägar för extraktion och klassificering av semantiska relationer i vetenskapliga artiklar', 'so': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Network with Shortest Dependence Paths for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'ur': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் SIRIUS- LTG- UiO: குறைந்தபட்ச ச சார்ந்த சார்ந்த சார்ந்த தொடர்பு பிரித்தல் மற்றும் அறிவியல் தாள்களில் வகைப்பு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'SISIS-LLG-UiTo Tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-208', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Конволюционни неврални мрежи с най-кратки пътища на зависимост за извличане и класификация на семантични взаимоотношения в научни статии', 'nl': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO bij SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Convolutionele Neurale Netwerken met Kortste Afhankelijkheidspaden voor Semantische Relatie Extractie en Classificatie in Wetenschappelijke Papers', 'da': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Konvolutionelle neurale netværk med korteste afhængighedsveje til ekstraktion og klassificering af semantiske relationer i videnskabelige papirer', 'id': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Jaringan Neural Konvelusional dengan Jalan Dependensi Terpendek untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Semantik dan Klasifikasi dalam Dokumen Sains', 'de': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 7: Convolutional Neuronal Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'hr': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: Konvolucionalne neurone mreže s najkraćim putem zavisnosti za ekstrakciju semantičkih odnosa i klasifikaciju u znanstvenim papirima', 'ko': 'SIRIUS LTG UiO가SemEval-18 임무7: 가장 짧은 의존 경로를 가진 권적 신경 네트워크는 과학 논문에서의 의미 관계 추출과 분류에 사용', 'fa': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'sw': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 7: Mitandao ya Neurali yenye Uhuru wa Kutegemea kwa njia mpito zaidi ya Kutengeneza Kuhusiana na Kutangaza kwa Kihisayansi', 'tr': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'af': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 7: Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke met kortste afhanklikheidspasies vir Semantiese Relasie Uitpakking en Klassifikasie in Wetenskaplike Papiere', 'am': 'ስራ 7: Convolution Neural Network with Shortest dependency Pats for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'hy': 'SIRIUS LTG-UO-ը 2018-ի «Սեմեվալ»-ի «Սեմեվալ»-ի «Սեմեվալ»-ի «Սեմենտ հարաբերությունների վերացման և դասակարգման միջոցներ» 7. հանձնարարում', 'sq': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO në SemEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'az': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relationship Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ৭-এ সিরিয়াস-এলটিজি-উইও: সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্কের জন্য সংক্ষিপ্ত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে সংক্ষিপ্ত নির্ভরিত পাথ এবং বি', 'bs': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: Konvolucionalne neurone mreže sa najkraćim putem zavisnosti za ekstrakciju semantičkih odnosa i klasifikaciju u naučnim papirima', 'cs': 'Úkol 7: Convoluční neuronové sítě s nejkratšími závislostními cestami pro extrakci a klasifikaci sémantických vztahů ve vědeckých článcích', 'ca': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependence Paths for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'et': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO SemEval-2018 ülesanne 7: konvolutsioonilised neurovõrgud, millel on lühikesed sõltuvustead semantiliste suhete ekstraheerimiseks ja klassifitseerimiseks teaduslikes artiklites', 'fi': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Konvolutionaaliset hermoverkot, joilla on lyhyimmät riippuvuussuhteet semanttisten suhteiden poimintaan ja luokitteluun tieteellisissä julkaisuissa', 'jv': 'SiRIus-LTG-UiO at seminval-2008 task 7: convolution Neral networks with shorter dependance paths for semanti Relation extration and CLssification in Sayensi Paper', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Konvolucijska živčna mreža z najkrajšimi potmi odvisnosti za ekstrakcijo in klasifikacijo semantičnih odnosov v znanstvenih člankih', 'he': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO ב SemEval-2018 משימה 7: רשתות עצביות משתנות עם דרכים של תלויות קצרות ביותר להוציא מערכות יחסים סמנטיות וקlassifikaציה במסמכים מדעיים', 'bo': 'SIRIUS-LTG-UiO at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Convolutional Neural Networks with Shortest Dependency Paths for Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers'}
{'en': 'This article presents the SIRIUS-LTG-UiO system for the SemEval 2018 Task 7 on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers. First we extract the shortest dependency path (sdp) between two entities, then we introduce a convolutional neural network (CNN) which takes the shortest dependency path embeddings as input and performs relation classification with differing objectives for each subtask of the shared task. This approach achieved overall F1 scores of 76.7 and 83.2 for relation classification on clean and noisy data, respectively. Furthermore, for combined relation extraction and classification on clean data, it obtained F1 scores of 37.4 and 33.6 for each phase. Our system ranks 3rd in all three sub-tasks of the shared task.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه المقالة نظام SIRIUS-LTG-UiO لمهمة SemEval 2018 7 حول استخراج العلاقات الدلالية وتصنيفها في الأوراق العلمية. أولاً ، نستخرج أقصر مسار تبعية (sdp) بين كيانين ، ثم نقدم شبكة عصبية تلافيفية (CNN) تأخذ أقصر مسار تبعية كمدخلات وتقوم بتصنيف العلاقة بأهداف مختلفة لكل مهمة فرعية من المهمة المشتركة. حقق هذا النهج درجات F1 الإجمالية من 76.7 و 83.2 لتصنيف العلاقة على البيانات النظيفة والصاخبة ، على التوالي. علاوة على ذلك ، بالنسبة لاستخراج العلاقة المشتركة وتصنيفها على بيانات نظيفة ، حصلت على درجات F1 من 37.4 و 33.6 لكل مرحلة. يحتل نظامنا المرتبة الثالثة في جميع المهام الفرعية الثلاث للمهمة المشتركة.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta el sistema Sirius-LTG-UIO para la Tarea 7 de SemEval 2018 sobre extracción y clasificación de relaciones semánticas en artículos científicos. Primero extraemos la ruta de dependencia más corta (sdp) entre dos entidades, luego introducimos una red neuronal convolucional (CNN) que toma las incrustaciones de la ruta de dependencia más corta como entrada y realiza la clasificación de relaciones con diferentes objetivos para cada subtarea de la tarea compartida. Este enfoque logró puntuaciones generales de F1 de 76,7 y 83,2 para la clasificación de relaciones en datos limpios y ruidosos, respectivamente. Además, para la extracción y clasificación de relaciones combinadas en datos limpios, obtuvo puntuaciones F1 de 37.4 y 33.6 para cada fase. Nuestro sistema ocupa el tercer lugar en las tres subtareas de la tarea compartida.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta o sistema SIRIUS-LTG-UiO para a Tarefa 7 do SemEval 2018 sobre Extração e Classificação de Relações Semânticas em Artigos Científicos. Primeiro, extraímos o caminho de dependência mais curto (sdp) entre duas entidades, depois introduzimos uma rede neural convolucional (CNN) que recebe os embeddings de caminho de dependência mais curto como entrada e executa a classificação de relações com objetivos diferentes para cada subtarefa da tarefa compartilhada. Essa abordagem alcançou pontuações gerais de F1 de 76,7 e 83,2 para classificação de relação em dados limpos e ruidosos, respectivamente. Além disso, para extração e classificação de relações combinadas em dados limpos, obteve escores F1 de 37,4 e 33,6 para cada fase. Nosso sistema ocupa o 3º lugar em todas as três subtarefas da tarefa compartilhada.', 'fr': "Cet article présente le système Sirius-LTG-UIO pour la tâche 7 de SemEval 2018 sur l'extraction et la classification des relations sémantiques dans les articles scientifiques. Nous extrayons d'abord le chemin de dépendance le plus court (sdp) entre deux entités, puis nous introduisons un réseau de neurones convolutifs (CNN) qui prend les intégrations de chemin de dépendance les plus courtes en entrée et effectue une classification des relations avec des objectifs différents pour chaque sous-tâche de la tâche partagée. Cette approche a permis d'obtenir des scores F1 globaux de 76,7 et 83,2 pour la classification des relations sur des données propres et bruyantes, respectivement. De plus, pour l'extraction de relations combinées et la classification sur des données propres, il a obtenu des scores F1 de 37,4 et 33,6 pour chaque phase. Notre système se classe au 3e rang dans les trois sous-tâches de la tâche partagée.", 'ja': 'この記事では、SemEval 2018のSemantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papersタスク7のためのSIRIUS - LTG - UiOシステムを紹介する。まず、2つのエンティティ間の最短依存経路（ sdp ）を抽出し、次に最短依存経路埋め込みを入力とし、共有タスクのサブタスクごとに異なる目的で関係分類を実行する畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）を導入する。このアプローチは、クリーンデータとノイズデータのリレーションシップ分類でそれぞれ76.7と83.2のF 1総合スコアを達成した。さらに、クリーンデータによる関係抽出と分類を組み合わせると、各フェーズで37.4、33.6のF 1スコアが得られた。当社のシステムは、共有タスクの3つのサブタスクすべてで3位です。', 'hi': 'यह आलेख वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में शब्दार्थ संबंध निष्कर्षण और वर्गीकरण पर SemEval 2018 कार्य 7 के लिए SIRIUS-LTG-UIO प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करता है। सबसे पहले हम दो संस्थाओं के बीच सबसे कम निर्भरता पथ (एसडीपी) निकालते हैं, फिर हम एक कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) पेश करते हैं जो इनपुट के रूप में सबसे कम निर्भरता पथ एम्बेडिंग लेता है और साझा कार्य के प्रत्येक उप-कार्य के लिए अलग-अलग उद्देश्यों के साथ संबंध वर्गीकरण करता है। इस दृष्टिकोण ने क्रमशः स्वच्छ और शोर डेटा पर संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए 76.7 और 83.2 के समग्र F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किए। इसके अलावा, स्वच्छ डेटा पर संयुक्त संबंध निष्कर्षण और वर्गीकरण के लिए, इसने प्रत्येक चरण के लिए 37.4 और 33.6 के F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किए। हमारा सिस्टम साझा कार्य के सभी तीन उप-कार्यों में तीसरे स्थान पर है।', 'zh': '本文引SemEval 2018务7Sirius-LTG-UiO统,事涉科学论文语义关系提取分类。 先取两实之最短赖径(sdp),然后引入一卷积神经网络(CNN),销其最短者为输,而为之共任者各有异类。 其法于净嘈杂数之类各得76.783.2之总体F1分。 〔外〕净数提取,得每段F1得分分为37.433.6。 我们的系统在共享的所有三个儿子中排名第三。', 'ru': 'В данной статье представлена система SIRIUS-LTG-UiO для задачи 7 SemEval 2018 по извлечению и классификации семантических отношений в научных работах. Сначала мы извлекаем кратчайший путь зависимости (sdp) между двумя сущностями, затем вводим сверточную нейронную сеть (CNN), которая берет в качестве входных данных вложения кратчайшего пути зависимости и выполняет классификацию отношений с различными целями для каждой подзадачи общей задачи. Этот подход позволил получить общие баллы F1 76,7 и 83,2 для классификации отношений по чистым и шумным данным, соответственно. Кроме того, для комбинированного извлечения отношения и классификации по чистым данным, он получил баллы F1 37,4 и 33,6 для каждой фазы. Наша система занимает 3-е место во всех трех подзадачах общей задачи.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an t-alt seo i láthair an córas SIRIUS-LTG-UiO do Thasc 7 SemEval 2018 ar Eastóscadh agus Aicmiú Gaol Séimeantach i bPáipéir Eolaíoch. Ar dtús bainimid an cosán spleáchais is giorra (sdp) idir dhá aonán, ansin tugaimid isteach líonra néarúil comhbheartaithe (CNN) a thógann na leabaithe cosáin spleáchais is giorra mar ionchur agus a dhéanann rangú gaol le cuspóirí éagsúla do gach fothasc den tasc roinnte. Bhain an cur chuige seo scóir foriomlána F1 de 76.7 agus 83.2 amach maidir le haicmiú coibhneasta ar shonraí glan agus torannacha, faoi seach. Ina theannta sin, maidir le heastóscadh comhcheangailte agus aicmiú ar shonraí glana, fuair sé scóir F1 de 37.4 agus 33.6 do gach céim. Tá ár gcóras sa 3ú háit i ngach ceann de na trí fhothasc den tasc roinnte.', 'hu': 'Ez a cikk bemutatja a SIRIUS-LTG-UiO rendszert a SemEval 2018 Task 7 szemantikus kapcsolat kivonásáról és osztályozásáról tudományos dolgozatokban. Először kivonjuk a legrövidebb függőségi útvonalat (sdp) két entitás között, majd bevezetünk egy konvolúciós neurális hálózatot (CNN), amely bemenetként veszi a legrövidebb függőségi útvonalak beágyazását, és a megosztott feladat minden részfeladatához különböző célokkal rendelkező kapcsolatosztályozást végez. Ez a megközelítés 76,7 és 83,2 összpontszámot ért el a tiszta, illetve zajos adatok alapján történő kapcsolatosztályozás tekintetében. Továbbá a kombinált kapcsolatkivonás és a tiszta adatok alapján történő osztályozás során minden fázisra 37,4 és 33,6 F1 pontszámot kapott. Rendszerünk a harmadik helyen áll a megosztott feladat mindhárom alcsoportjában.', 'el': 'Το παρόν άρθρο παρουσιάζει το σύστημα για την εργασία 7 για την εξαγωγή και ταξινόμηση σημασματικών σχέσεων σε επιστημονικές εργασίες. Πρώτα εξάγουμε τη συντομότερη διαδρομή εξάρτησης (μεταξύ δύο οντοτήτων, στη συνέχεια εισάγουμε ένα σύνθετο νευρωνικό δίκτυο (το οποίο παίρνει τις συντομότερες ενσωματώσεις διαδρομής εξάρτησης ως εισαγωγή και εκτελεί ταξινόμηση σχέσεων με διαφορετικούς στόχους για κάθε δευτερεύουσα εργασία της κοινής εργασίας. Η προσέγγιση αυτή επέτυχε συνολικές βαθμολογίες F1 76.7 και 83.2 για την ταξινόμηση σχέσεων σε καθαρά και θορυβώδη δεδομένα αντίστοιχα. Επιπλέον, για τη συνδυασμένη εξαγωγή σχέσεων και ταξινόμηση σε καθαρά δεδομένα, έλαβε βαθμολογίες F1 37.4 και 33.6 για κάθε φάση. Το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται 3η και στις τρεις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες της κοινής εργασίας.', 'ka': 'ეს წესტია SIRIUS-LTG-UiO სისტემის ჩვენება semiEval 2018 დავალებისთვის 7-ზე Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers. პირველად ჩვენ ორი ინტერტიების შორის ყველაზე კიდევ კონტროლური ნეიროლური ქსელი (CNN) გამოყენებთ, რომელიც ყველაზე კიდევ კიდევ კიდევ კონტროლური დამხმარებულობის გეზი იყენებს როგორც ჩანაწერა და გავაკეთებთ კ ეს პროგრამა სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა F1 დამატებით, ჩვენი მონაცემებისთვის კომბინეციული გექსტრექციის და კლასიფიკაციის შესაძლებელად, ის მიღება 37.4 და 33.6 წერტილების F1 წერტილები ყოველ ფაზისთვის. ჩვენი სისტემა სამი სამხოლოდ სამხოლოდ სამხოლოდ სამხოლოდ სამხოლოდ სამხოლოდ სამხოლოდ სამხოლოდ სამხოლოდ სამხოლო', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta il sistema SIRIUS-LTG-UiO per il Task 7 SemEval 2018 sull'estrazione e classificazione delle relazioni semantiche nei documenti scientifici. Per prima cosa estraiamo il percorso di dipendenza più breve (sdp) tra due entità, poi introduciamo una rete neurale convoluzionale (CNN) che prende le incorporazioni del percorso di dipendenza più breve come input ed esegue la classificazione delle relazioni con obiettivi diversi per ogni sottomissione del task condiviso. Questo approccio ha ottenuto punteggi F1 complessivi di 76,7 e 83,2 per la classificazione delle relazioni su dati puliti e rumorosi, rispettivamente. Inoltre, per l'estrazione combinata delle relazioni e la classificazione su dati puliti, ha ottenuto punteggi F1 di 37,4 e 33,6 per ogni fase. Il nostro sistema si colloca al terzo posto in tutti e tre i sottocompiti del compito condiviso.", 'kk': 'Бұл мақала 2018 жылдың semiEval 7 тапсырмасының SIRIUS-LTG-UiO жүйесін білім құжаттардың Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification жүйесін көрсетеді. Біріншіден екі нысанның арасындағы ең қысқа тәуелдік жолын (sdp) тарқатып, содан кейін бөлінген тапсырманың әрбір ішкі суретінің қасиеттері үшін ең қысқа тәуелдік жолын ендіру үшін қысқа тәуелдік жолын (CNN) келтіріп Бұл тәсілі таза және дыбыс деректерінің қатынасы үшін 76, 7 және 83, 2 деген F1 нәтижесін жеткізді. Қосымша, таза деректерінің біріктірілген қатынасын тарқату және классификациялау үшін әрбір этап үшін F1 нөмірі 37, 4 және 33, 6 болды. Біздің жүйеміз ортақ тапсырманың үш ішкі тапсырмаларында үшінші жолдар.', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje pateikiama SIRIUS-LTG-UiO sistema, skirta 2018 m. pusmečio vertinimo 7 uždaviniui dėl seminių santykių ekstrahavimo ir klasifikavimo moksliniuose dokumentuose. Pirmiausia ištraukiame trumpiausią dviejų subjektų priklausomybės kelią (sdp), tada įdiegiame konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą (CNN), kuris laiko trumpiausią priklausomybės kelio įdėjimą kaip įvestį ir atlieka santykių klasifikavimą su skirtingais tikslais kiekvienam bendros užduoties pakopai. Šiuo metodu pasiektas atitinkamai 76,7 ir 83,2 F1 rodiklių santykių klasifikavimui švarių ir triukšmingų duomenų atžvilgiu. Be to, bendrai išgaunant ir klasifikuojant švarius duomenis, kiekvienam etapui buvo gauti F1 rezultatai 37,4 ir 33,6. Mūsų sistema yra trečia iš trijų bendros užduoties dalių.', 'ms': 'Artikel ini memperkenalkan sistem SIRIUS-LTG-UiO untuk SemEval 2018 Tugas 7 mengenai Ekstraksi Hubungan Semantik dan Klasifikasi dalam Dokumen Saintifik. Pertama, kita mengekstrak laluan dependensi yang paling pendek (sdp) antara dua entiti, kemudian kita memperkenalkan rangkaian saraf konvolutional (CNN) yang mengambil laluan dependensi yang paling pendek sebagai input dan melaksanakan klasifikasi hubungan dengan tujuan yang berbeza untuk setiap subtanya tugas berkongsi. Pendekatan ini mencapai skor F1 keseluruhan 76.7 dan 83.2 untuk kelasukan hubungan pada data bersih dan bunyi, berdasarkan itu. Selain itu, untuk ekstraksi hubungan dan kelasukan pada data bersih, ia mendapat skor F1 37.4 dan 33.6 untuk setiap fasa. Sistem kita berturut-turut ke-3 dalam tiga sub-tugas tugas berkongsi.', 'ml': 'ഈ ലിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d സെമ്മെന്\u200dറിക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും ക്ലാസിഷനിക്കുന്നതിനും സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7-നു ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും ചെറുതായ ആശ്രയിതമായ വഴി (ഡിസിപി) പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് പരിചയപ്പെടുത ഈ നടപടി ഏകദേശം ഏകദേശം 76. 7 എന്നിട്ടും 83. 2 സ്കോര്\u200d നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ശുദ്ധവും ശബ്ദ വിവരങ്ങളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തു അതിനുശേഷം, ഒരുമിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനും ശുദ്ധ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷനുമായി അത് എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d 37.  നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ മൂന്നാമത്തെ സംരക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന ജോലിയിലെ എല്ലാ മൂന്', 'mt': 'Dan l-artikolu jippreżenta s-sistema SIRIUS-LTG-UiO għas-SemEval 2018 Task 7 dwar l-Estrazzjoni u l-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet Semantiċi fid-Dokumenti Xjentifiċi. L-ewwel neħħew l-eqreb triq ta’ dipendenza (sdp) bejn żewġ entitajiet, imbagħad nintroduċu netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali (CNN) li jieħu l-eqreb triq ta’ dipendenza inkorporati bħala input u jwettaq klassifikazzjoni ta’ relazzjoni ma’ għanijiet differenti għal kull sottotalba tal-kompitu kondiviż. Dan l-approċċ kiseb punteġġi F1 globali ta’ 76.7 u 83.2 għall-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjoni dwar dejta nadifa u storbjuża, rispettivament. Barra minn hekk, għall-estrazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjoni kkombinata fuq dejta nadifa, kisbet punteġġi F1 ta’ 37.4 u 33.6 għal kull fażi. Is-sistema tagħna tikklassifika t-tielet fit-tliet sottokompiti kollha tal-kompitu kondiviż.', 'mk': 'Оваа статија го претставува системот SIRIUS-LTG-UiO за задачата 7 SemEval 2018 за екстракција и класификација на семантичките односи во научните документи. Прво ја извадуваме најкратката патека на зависност (sdp) помеѓу двата ентитети, потоа воведуваме конволуционална нервна мрежа (CNN) која ја зема најкратката патека на зависност како влог и извршува класификација на врските со различни цели за секоја подпоставка на заедничката задача. Овој пристап постигна вкупни оценки на F1 од 76,7 и 83,2 за класификацијата на односите на чистите и звучните податоци, односно. Покрај тоа, за комбинирана екстракција на односи и класификација на чисти податоци, таа доби оценки F1 од 37,4 и 33,6 за секоја фаза. Our system ranks 3rd in all three sub-tasks of the shared task.', 'no': 'Denne artikkelen viser SIRIUS-LTG-UiO-systemet for semiEval 2018 oppgåva 7 om semiantisk utpakking og klassifisering i vitenskapelige papir. Først ekstraherer vi den korte avhengighetsbanen (sdp) mellom to einingar, og så introduserer vi ein konvolusjonell neuralnettverk (CNN), som tar den korte avhengighetsbanen som inndata og utfører relasjonsklassifikasjonen med ulike mål for kvar underspøring av delt oppgåve. Denne tilnærminga oppnådd heile F1-poeng med 76,7 og 83,2 for relasjonsklassifikasjon på rein og støy-data. For kombinasjon av relasjonar og klassifikasjon på reine data, fikk han F1- poeng med 37, 4 og 33, 6 for kvar fase. Systemet vårt rankerer tredje i alle tre underoppgåver i delt oppgåve.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono system SIRIUS-LTG-UiO dla zadania SemEval 2018 7 na temat ekstrakcji i klasyfikacji relacji semantycznych w pracach naukowych. Najpierw wyodrębniamy najkrótszą ścieżkę zależności (sdp) między dwoma podmiotami, następnie wprowadzamy konwolucyjną sieć neuronową (CNN), która bierze najkrótsze osadzenia ścieżek zależności jako wejście i wykonuje klasyfikację relacji o różnych celach dla każdego podzadania wspólnego. Podejście to osiągnęło ogólne wyniki F1 76.7 i 83.2 w odniesieniu do klasyfikacji relacji na czystych i szumownych danych. Ponadto w przypadku połączonej ekstrakcji relacji i klasyfikacji na podstawie czystych danych uzyskał wyniki F1 37.4 i 33.6 dla każdej fazy. Nasz system zajmuje trzecie miejsce we wszystkich trzech podzadaniach wspólnego zadania.', 'mn': 'Энэ баримт SIRIUS-LTG-UiO системийг шинжлэх ухааны баримтуудын SemEval 2018 Task 7-ийн Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification System-г харуулдаг. Эхлээд бид хоёр бүлгийн хооронд хамгийн богино хамааралтай зам (sdp) гаргаж, дараа нь бид хуваалцах үйл ажлын хамгийн богино хамааралтай хамгийн бага хамааралтай зам (CNN) болон хуваалцах зорилготой холбоотой холбоотой зүйлсийг ашигладаг. Энэ арга зам нь цэвэр болон чимээгүй мэдээллийн холбоотой холбоотой 76.7 болон 83.2 тооны нийтлэг F1 оноо гарч ирсэн. Мөн цэвэр өгөгдлийн холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой болон хуваалцааны хувьд F1 хэмжээний 37.4 болон 33.6 хэмжээний хувьд гарч ирсэн. Бидний систем хуваалцах ажлын 3 дахь даалгавар дээр 3 дахь байдаг.', 'ro': 'Acest articol prezintă sistemul SIRIUS-LTG-UiO pentru SemEval 2018 Task 7 privind extragerea relațiilor semantice și clasificarea în lucrări științifice. Mai întâi extragem cea mai scurtă cale de dependență (sdp) între două entități, apoi introducem o rețea neuronală convoluțională (CNN) care ia cele mai scurte încorporări de cale de dependență ca intrare și efectuează clasificarea relațiilor cu obiective diferite pentru fiecare subactivitate a sarcinii partajate. Această abordare a obținut scoruri F1 globale de 76,7 și 83,2 pentru clasificarea relațiilor pe date curate și, respectiv, zgomotoase. În plus, pentru extragerea relațiilor combinate și clasificarea pe date curate, a obținut scoruri F1 de 37,4 și 33,6 pentru fiecare fază. Sistemul nostru ocupă locul 3 în toate cele trei subsarcini ale sarcinii comune.', 'sr': 'Ovaj članak predstavlja SIRIUS-LTG-UiO sistem za zadatak 7 za semi-Eval 2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa u naučnim papirima. Prvo izvlačimo najkraći put zavisnosti (sdp) između dva entiteta, onda predstavljamo konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu (CNN), koja uzima najkraći način zavisnosti koji se uključuje kao ulaz i izvodi klasifikaciju veze sa različitim ciljevima za svaku podpitanje zajedničkog zadatka. Ovaj pristup je postigao cjelokupan rezultat F1 od 76,7 i 83,2 za klasifikaciju odnosa o čistim i buknim podacima. Osim toga, za kombiniranu ekstrakciju i klasifikaciju veza na čiste podatke, dobila je rezultate F1 od 37,4 i 33,6 za svaku fazu. Naš sistem je treći u svim tri podzadatka zajedničkog zadatka.', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනය පෙනුවෙන් SIRIUS-LTG-UiO පද්ධතිය සෙම්වේල් 2018 වැඩ 7 ගැන සෙම්පැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණය සහ විද්\u200dයාත්ම මුලින්ම අපි දෙන්නෙක් අතර දෙන්නෙක් අතර පරික්ෂා විශේෂ විශේෂතාව (sdp) නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඊට පස්සේ අපි සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂ න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (CNN) කිරීම්  මේ විධානය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන්  ඉතින්, සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සහ පරික්ෂා දත්ත සඳහා පරික්ෂා සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම් අපේ පද්ධතිය තුන්වෙනි පද්ධතිය සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩේ තුන්දෙනි වැඩේ තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Warqaddan wuxuu soo saaraa SIRIUS-LTG-UiO nidaamka SemEval 2018 shaqo 7 oo ku saabsan Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification of Scientific Papers. Marka ugu horeysa waxaan soo saarnaa wado ugu gaaban ee ku saabsan labada jidood dhexdooda, dabadeedna waxaan soo bandhigaynaa shabakad koox ah oo ku saabsan wadada ugu gaaban ee ku xiran sida input oo kale, waxaana sameynaa fasax la xiriira waxyaabo kala duduwan oo u dhexeeya shaqada la qaybsan. Dhacdooyinkan waxay gaadhay koox F1 oo dhan oo ah 76.7 iyo 83.2 si loo kala soocayyo macluumaadka xiriirka ee daahirsan iyo qaylada. Furthermore, in la isku daro soo bixinta xiriirka iyo fasalka macluumaadka daahirka ah, waxaa la helay F1 koox kasta oo ah 37.4 iyo 33.6 fasax kasta. Isticmaddeena waxay ka dhigaan saddex meelood oo ka mid ah sadex shaqo qayb ah.', 'sv': 'Denna artikel presenterar SIRIUS-LTG-UiO-systemet för SemEval 2018 Task 7 om Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers. Först extraherar vi den kortaste beroendebanan (sdp) mellan två entiteter, sedan introducerar vi ett konvulutionellt neuralt nätverk (CNN) som tar de kortaste beroendebaninbäddningarna som indata och utför relationsklassificering med olika mål för varje underaktivitet av den delade uppgiften. Detta tillvägagångssätt uppnådde övergripande F1 poäng på 76,7 respektive 83,2 för relationsklassificering på rena respektive bullriga data. Dessutom, för kombinerad relation extraktion och klassificering på rena data, fick den F1 poäng på 37,4 och 33,6 för varje fas. Vårt system rankas 3:e i alla tre deluppgifterna i den delade uppgiften.', 'ta': 'This article presents the SIRIUS- LTG- UiO system for the SemEval 2018 Task 7 on Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers. முதலில் நாம் இரண்டு பொருளுக்கிடையில் குறைந்த சார்பு பாதையை வெளியேற்றுகிறோம், பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு முழுமையான புதிய வலைப்பின்னலை (CNN) அறிவிக்கிறோம். அது உள்ளீட்டில் உள்ள இந்த வழிமுறை மொத்த F1 மதிப்பெண்கள் 76. 7 மற்றும் 83. 2 தொடர்பு வகைப்படுத்தல் சுத்தமான மற்றும் சப்தமான தகவல் மீது பெற்றது. அதற்கும், தொடர்பு பிரித்தல் மற்றும் சுத்தமான தரவை வகுப்பதற்கு, ஒவ்வொரு நிலைக்கும் F1 புள்ளிகள் 37. 4 மற்றும் 33. 6 கிடைத்தது. எங்கள் அமைப்பு பங்கிடப்பட்ட பணியின் அனைத்து மூன்றாவது முறை உள்ளது.', 'ur': 'This article presents the SIRIUS-LTG-UiO system for the SemEval 2018 Task 7 on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers. پہلے ہم دو واحدوں کے درمیان چھوٹا اعتمادی مسیر (sdp) نکالتے ہیں، پھر ہم ایک کامل نیورل نیورل نیٹورک (CNN) کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو سب سے چھوٹا اعتمادی مسیر کے مطابق وارد کرتا ہے اور ہر مشترک کام کے مطابق مختلف موضوع کے ساتھ ارتباط کرتا ہے۔ یہ طریقہ 76.7 اور 83.2 کے سب F1 اسکوروں کو پاکیزہ اور صوت ڈیٹوں کے معاملہ کے لئے پہنچ گیا۔ اس کے علاوہ، پاکیزہ ڈیٹا پر جمع ہوئے ارتباط اضافہ اور کلاسیفون کے لئے، اس نے ہر فاصلہ کے لئے 37.4 اور 33.6 فوجیں F1 سکوٹ پائیں۔ ہماری سیستم تین سابقہ کاروں میں تین درجے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Birinchisi biz ikki obʼektlar orasidagi qisqa ishlatuvchi yoʻlni chiqaramiz, keyin biz bir qisqa ishlatuvchi tarmoqni (CNN) ishlatamiz. Ulangan vazifaning har bir xil vazifaning bir qanchalik bilan boshqa maqola bilan bog'liq darajasini bajaramiz. Bu usulni boshqa bir necha bogʻ'liq va toʻgʻri maʼlumot uchun darajalashtirish uchun 76.7 va 83.2 foydalanadi. Ko'rsatilgan, boshqa birlashtirish va safar maʼlumotlarning darajasini birlashtirish uchun u bir darajaga F1 scori 37.4 va 33.6 darajaga ega. Bizning tizimmiz bir necha uchta vazifani o'xshash vazifalarga uchinchi darajada.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này giới thiệu hệ thống SIRIUS-LG-bất-Vị cho Nhiệm vụ SemEvl 2008 7 về chiết xuất và phân bổ liên quan hóa chất trong các sách khoa học. Đầu tiên, chúng ta trích ra đường dẫn độ phụ thuộc ngắn nhất (sdp) giữa hai thực thể, sau đó chúng ta tạo ra một mạng lưới thần kinh kết nối (CNN) mà sử dụng việc nhúng vào đường phụ thuộc ngắn nhất và thực hiện phân loại liên quan với các mục tiêu khác nhau cho mỗi phần phụ đề của nhiệm vụ chia sẻ. Cách tiếp cận này đã đạt được điểm số F1 của bộ phận...! Thêm vào đó, nó thu thập các điểm F1 của 37.4 và 33.6 cho mỗi giai đoạn. Hệ thống của chúng ta đứng thứ ba trong ba nhiệm vụ chung.', 'hr': 'Ovaj članak predstavlja SIRIUS-LTG-UiO sustav za zadatak 7 za pola Evala 2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa u znanstvenim papirima. Prvo izvlačimo najkraći put zavisnosti (sdp) između dva entiteta, a onda predstavljamo konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu (CNN), koja uzima najkraći način zavisnosti koji se uključuje kao ulaz i izvodi povezanje klasifikaciju s različitim ciljevima za svaku podupitniku zajedničkog zadatka. Ovaj pristup je postigao cjelokupan rezultat F1 od 76,7 i 83,2 za klasifikaciju veze s čistim i buknim podacima. Osim toga, za kombiniranu ekstrakciju i klasifikaciju veze na čiste podatke, dobila je rezultate F1 od 37,4 i 33,6 za svaku fazu. Naš sustav je treći u svim tri podzadatka zajedničkog zadatka.', 'bg': 'Тази статия представя системата за извличане и класифициране на семантични взаимоотношения в научни статии. Първо извличаме най-краткия път на зависимост между две единици, след това въвеждаме конволюционна невронна мрежа (която приема най-кратките вграждания на пътя на зависимост като вход и извършва класификация на отношенията с различни цели за всяка подзадача на споделената задача. Този подход постига общи резултати от 76,7 и 83,2 за относителна класификация на чисти и шумни данни съответно. Освен това, за комбинирана връзка екстракция и класификация на чисти данни, тя получава оценки от 37,4 и 33,6 за всяка фаза. Системата ни се нарежда на трето място във всичките три подзадачи на споделената задача.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer SIRIUS-LTG-UiO-systemet til SemEval 2018 Task 7 om Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers. Først udtrækker vi den korteste afhængighedssti (sdp) mellem to enheder, derefter introducerer vi et konvulutivt neuralt netværk (CNN), som tager de korteste afhængighedssti indlejringer som input og udfører relationsklassificering med forskellige mål for hver underopgave af den delte opgave. Denne fremgangsmåde opnåede en samlet F1 score på 76,7 og 83,2 for relationsklassificering på henholdsvis rene og støjende data. For kombineret relation ekstraktion og klassificering på rene data opnåede den desuden F1 score på 37,4 og 33,6 for hver fase. Vores system rangerer 3. i alle tre underopgaver i den fælles opgave.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert het SIRIUS-LTG-UiO systeem voor de SemEval 2018 Taak 7 over Semantische Relatie Extractie en Classificatie in Wetenschappelijke Papers. Eerst extraheren we het kortste afhankelijkheidspad (sdp) tussen twee entiteiten, dan introduceren we een convolutional neural network (CNN) dat de kortste afhankelijkheidspad insluitingen als input neemt en relatieklassificatie uitvoert met verschillende doelstellingen voor elke subtaak van de gedeelde taak. Deze benadering bereikte algemene F1-scores van respectievelijk 76.7 en 83.2 voor relatieklassificatie op schone en lawaaierige gegevens. Bovendien behaalde het voor gecombineerde relatieonderzoek en classificatie op schone gegevens F1-scores van 37.4 en 33.6 voor elke fase. Ons systeem staat op de derde plaats in alle drie de deeltaken van de gedeelde taak.', 'de': 'Dieser Artikel stellt das SIRIUS-LTG-UiO System für die SemEval 2018 Task 7 zur Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers vor. Zuerst extrahieren wir den kürzesten Abhängigkeitspfad (sdp) zwischen zwei Entitäten, dann führen wir ein Convolutional Neuronal Network (CNN) ein, das die kürzesten Abhängigkeitspfad Einbettungen als Eingabe nimmt und Relationsklassifikationen mit unterschiedlichen Zielen für jede Teilaufgabe der gemeinsamen Aufgabe durchführt. Dieser Ansatz erzielte insgesamt F1-Scores von 76.7 und 83.2 für die Relationsklassifikation auf sauberen und verrauschten Daten. Darüber hinaus wurden für die kombinierte Beziehungsextraktion und Klassifizierung auf sauberen Daten F1-Werte von 37.4 und 33.6 für jede Phase erzielt. Unser System belegt den dritten Platz in allen drei Teilaufgaben der gemeinsamen Aufgabe.', 'id': 'Artikel ini mempersembahkan sistem SIRIUS-LTG-UiO untuk SemEval 2018 Tugas 7 tentang Ekstraksi Hubungan Semantik dan Klasifikasi dalam Dokumen Sains. Pertama kita mengekstrak jalur terpendek dependensi (sdp) antara dua entitas, kemudian kita memperkenalkan jaringan saraf konvolusi (CNN) yang mengambil jalur terpendek dependensi embedding sebagai input dan melakukan klasifikasi hubungan dengan tujuan yang berbeda untuk setiap subtask dari tugas bersama. Pendekatan ini mencapai nilai F1 keseluruhan 76,7 dan 83,2 untuk klasifikasi hubungan pada data bersih dan berisik, sesuai. Selain itu, untuk ekstraksi hubungan kombinasi dan klasifikasi pada data bersih, ia mendapatkan skor F1 37,4 dan 33,6 untuk setiap fase. Sistem kita tertinggi ke-3 dalam tiga tugas bawah tugas yang sama.', 'ko': '본고는 SIRIUS LTG UiO 시스템을 소개하여SemEval 2018 임무 7에서 과학 논문에서 의미 관계를 추출하고 분류하는 데 사용한다.먼저 두 실체 사이의 가장 짧은 의존 경로(sdp)를 추출한 다음에 권적신경 네트워크(CNN)를 도입하면 이 네트워크는 가장 짧은 의존 경로를 입력으로 삽입하고 공유 작업의 각 하위 작업 수행에 서로 다른 목표를 가진 관계 분류를 한다.이런 방법은 깨끗한 데이터와 소음 데이터의 관계 분류에 있어 F1의 총점은 각각 76.7과 83.2이다.또한 깨끗한 데이터의 조합 관계 추출과 분류에 대해 단계별 F1 점수는 각각 37.4와 33.6을 기록했다.우리 시스템은 임무를 공유하는 모든 세 개의 하위 임무 중 3위에 랭크되어 있다.', 'fa': 'این مقاله سیستم SIRIUS-LTG-UiO را برای ماموریت نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ در مورد اخراج و کلاس\u200cسازی رابطه\u200cهای نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ در روزنامه\u200cهای علمی نشان می\u200cدهد. اول ما مسیر بستگی کوتاه\u200cترین (sdp) بین دو واحد خارج می\u200cکنیم، سپس یک شبکه عصبی (CNN) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که کوتاه\u200cترین مسیر بستگی را به عنوان ورودی می\u200cگیرد و ارتباط\u200cها را با هدف\u200cهای متفاوت برای هر زیر خواست از کار مشترک انجام می\u200cدهد. این روش به طور کل امتیاز F1 از 76.7 و 83.2 برای گروه ارتباطی بر داده های پاک و صوت رسید. علاوه بر این، برای اخراج و کلیسازی ارتباط متحده بر داده های پاکیزه، نمونه F1 از 37.4 و 33.6 برای هر مراحل دریافت شد. سیستم ما درجه سوم در تمام سه عملیات زیر کار مشترک است.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha mfumo wa SIRIUS-LTG-UiO kwa ajili ya SemEval 2018 kazi 7 kuhusu Utoaji na Utafiti wa Kisayansi. Kwanza tunatoa njia mpya ya kutegemea (sdp) kati ya vitu viwili, kisha tunaonyesha mtandao wa kikatili wa neura (CNN) ambacho kinachukua njia mpya ya kutegemea kwa ajili ya kujiunga na kuhusiana na malengo tofauti kwa kila kazi ya ushirikiano. Hatua hii ilifanikiwa kwa ujumla wa F1 score za 76.7 na 83.2 kwa ajili ya kutangazwa kwa taarifa safi na kelele za watu. Zaidi ya hayo, kwa ajili ya kuunganisha uhusiano na usambazaji wa data safi, ilipata vipindi vya F1 vya 37.4 na 33.6 kwa kila hatua. Mfumo wetu umekuwa wa tatu katika kazi zote tatu za kazi za ushirikiano.', 'af': "Hierdie artikel stel die SIRIUS-LTG-UiO stelsel voor die semiEval 2018 taak 7 op Semantiese Relasie Uitpakking en Klassifikasie in Wetenskaplike Papiere. Eerste pak ons die kortste afhanklikheid pad (sdp) tussen twee entiteite uit, dan introduseer ons 'n konvolusionele neuralnetwerk (CNN) wat neem die kortste afhanklikheid pad inbettings as invoer en uitvoer verwanting klassifikasie met verskillende objekte vir elke ondersoek van die gedeelde taak. Hierdie toegang het die hele F1 telling van 76. 7 en 83. 2 bereik vir verwanting klasifikasie op skoon en geluid data, respektief. Verder, vir gekombineerde verhouding van uitpakking en klasifikasie op skoon data, het dit F1 telling van 37. 4 en 33. 6 vir elke fase ontvang. Ons stelsel rank 3de in al drie sub-taak van die gedeelde taak.", 'tr': 'Bu makala SIRIUS-LTG-UiO sistemini SemEval 2018 Task 7 üzerinde Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Ilmi Gazetelerde görkez edýär. Ilkinji gezek iki enti arasynda iň kiçi baglanylyk ýunlary (sdp) çykaryp, soňra diskwelik näyral şebeke (CNN) girişi diýip çarpan iň kiçi baglanylyk ýunlary baglanşyk ýunlary bilen baglanşyk maksadyny çykaryp barýarys. Bu ýalaşyk 76.7 we 83.2 derejäň arasynda tüz we sesli maglumatlar bilen baglaşyk derejesi üçin ýetdi. Munuň üçin, temiz data hakynda tertiblenen baglaýyşyk Extraction we klasifikasyon üçin, her fas üçin F1 अ 37.4 we 33.6 aldy. Biziň sistemamyz paýlaşan işiň üç sub-zadynda üçünji sapar.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull paraqet sistemin SIRIUS-LTG-UiO për Detyrën SemEval 2018 7 mbi nxjerrjen dhe klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve Semantike në dokumentet shkencore. Së pari nxjerrim rrugën më të shkurtër të varësisë (sdp) midis dy njësive, pastaj futim një rrjet nervor konvolutiv (CNN) që merr shtigjen më të shkurtër të varësisë si hyrje dhe kryen klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve me objektiva të ndryshme për çdo nënkërkesë të detyrës së përbashkët. Ky qasje arriti rezultatet e përgjithshme F1 prej 76.7 dhe 83.2 për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve respektivisht mbi të dhënat e pastra dhe të zhurmshme. Përveç kësaj, për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të kombinuara dhe klasifikimin e të dhënave të pastra, ajo fitoi rezultate F1 prej 37.4 dhe 33.6 për çdo fazë. Our system ranks 3rd in all three sub-tasks of the shared task.', 'am': 'ይህ ጽሑፍ በሳይንሳዊ ገጾች ውስጥ ስምEval 2018 ስራ 7 ላይ ሲሪUS-LTG-UiO ስርዓቱን የሚያቀርብ ነው። First we extract the shortest dependency path (sdp) between two entities, then we introduce a convolutional neural network (CNN) which takes the shortest dependency path embeddings as input and performs relation classification with differing objectives for each subtask of the shared task.  ይህም ሥርዓት በንጹሕ እና የድምፅ አዳራሽ ላይ ለግንኙነት መግለጫ 76.7 እና 83.2 ነጥብ አግኝቷል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የግንኙነት ማውጣት እና በተለየ ንጹሕ ዳታዎችን ለመቀላቀል F1 score 37.4 እና 33.6 ለሁሉም ደረጃዎች አግኝቷል፡፡ ስርዓታችን በሦስት Sub-ስራ ሁሉ ሦስተኛ ደረጃዎች ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է SIRIUS LTG-UO համակարգը 2018 թվականի կիսագնահատականի 7-րդ հանձնարարության համար, որը վերաբերում է սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների արտահանմանը և գիտական փաստաթղթերի դասակարգումը: Սկզբում մենք դուրս ենք բերում երկու միավորների միջև ամենակարճ կախվածության ճանապարհը, հետո մենք ներկայացնում ենք համառուցվածքային նյարդային ցանց (CNN), որը վերցնում է ամենակարճ կախվածության ճանապարհի ներդրումը որպես ներմուծք և կատարում է հարաբերությունների դասակարգում տարբեր նպատակների հետ,  Այս մոտեցումը հասավ մաքուր և աղմկոտ տվյալների հարաբերության դասակարգում 76.7 և 82.2 F1-ի ընդհանուր գնահատականների: Ավելին, մաքուր տվյալների համադրված հարաբերությունների վերացման և դասակարգման համար այն ստացավ F1 գնահատականներ 37.4 և 33.6 յուրաքանչյուր դեպքում: Մեր համակարգը դասակարգվում է երրորդ համագործակցության երեք ենթախնդիրներում:', 'az': "Bu məktub, Bilim Kağıtlarında Semantik İlişkisi Çıkarma və Klasifikasyon 7'nin Semantik İlişkilər üçün SIRIUS-LTG-UiO sistemini göstərir. Əvvəlcə iki entitə arasında ən qısa bağımlılıq yolunu (sdp) çıxarırıq, sonra hər hissəsinin dəyişiklik məqsədilə müxtəlif məqsədilə ən qısa bağımlılıq yolunu alır. Bu tərzim təmiz və gürültü məlumatları barəsindəki ilişkil seçmək üçün 76,7 və 83,2 F1 müqayisədə başa düşdü. Daha sonra, təmiz məlumatların birləşdirilməsi və klasifikasyonu üçün hər fərz üçün F1 səviyyələri 37.4 və 33.6 aldı. Sistemimiz paylaşılmış işlərin üç sub-tasklərində üçüncü dərəcə verir.", 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটি সেমইভাল ২০১৮ সালের জন্য সিরিয়াস-এলটিজি-ইউআইও সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করেছে বিজ্ঞান পত্রিকায় সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক বিনিময় এবং  প্রথমে আমরা দুই বস্তুর মধ্যে সর্বোচ্চ নির্ভরশীল পথ (ডিএসপি) বের করে নেই, তারপর আমরা একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই যা প্রতিটি শেয়ার কর্মের প্রতি বিভিন্ন উদ্দেশ্যের সাথে  এই পদক্ষেপ পরিষ্কার এবং শব্দ তথ্য নিয়ে সম্পর্ক বিভাগের জন্য ৭৬. ৭ এবং ৮৩. এছাড়াও, পরিষ্কার তথ্যে সম্পর্ক বের করা এবং পরিষ্কার বিভাগের জন্য, প্রত্যেক পর্যায়ের জন্য এফ১ স্কোর ৩৭. ৪ এবং ৩৩. আমাদের সিস্টেম তিনটি সাব কাজের মধ্যে তৃতীয় সংখ্যা।', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje systém SIRIUS-LTG-UiO pro SemEval 2018 Task 7 na extrakci a klasifikaci sémantických vztahů ve vědeckých článcích. Nejprve extrahujeme nejkratší cestu závislosti (sdp) mezi dvěma entitami, poté představíme konvoluční neuronovou síť (CNN), která bere nejkratší vložení cesty závislosti jako vstup a provádí klasifikaci vztahů s různými cíli pro každou podúlohu sdílené úlohy. Tento přístup dosáhl celkových bodů F1 76.7 a 83.2 pro klasifikaci vztahů na čistých a hlučných datech. Dále pro kombinovanou extrakci vztahů a klasifikaci na čistých údajích získala F1 skóre 37,4 a 33,6 pro každou fázi. Náš systém je ve všech třech podúkolech sdíleného úkolu třetí.', 'bs': 'Ovaj članak predstavlja SIRIUS-LTG-UiO sistem za zadatak 7 iz polovice 2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa u naučnim papirima. Prvo izvlačimo najkraći put zavisnosti (sdp) između dva entiteta, a onda predstavljamo konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu (CNN), koja uzima najkraći način zavisnosti koji se uključuje kao ulaz i izvodi klasifikaciju veze sa različitim ciljevima za svaku podpitanje zajedničkog zadatka. Ovaj pristup je postigao cjelokupan rezultat F1 od 76,7 i 83,2 za klasifikaciju odnosa o čistim i buknim podacima. Osim toga, za kombiniranu ekstrakciju i klasifikaciju veza na čiste podatke, dobila je rezultate F1 od 37,4 i 33,6 za svaku fazu. Naš sistem je treći u svim tri podzadatka zajedničkog zadatka.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis tutvustatakse SIRIUS-LTG-UiO süsteemi SemEval 2018 ülesandeks 7 semantiliste suhete ekstraheerimise ja klassifitseerimise kohta teaduslikes artiklites. Kõigepealt ekstraheerime kahe olemi vahelise lühima sõltuvustee (sdp), seejärel tutvustame konvolutsioonivõrku (CNN), mis võtab sisendina kõige lühema sõltuvustee põimimised ja teostab seoste klassifikatsiooni erinevate eesmärkidega iga jagatud ülesande jaoks. Selle lähenemisviisiga saavutati F1 üldine skoor 76,7 ja 83,2 puhaste ja mürakate andmete suhtelise klassifikatsiooni puhul. Lisaks saavutati puhaste andmete kombineeritud ekstraheerimise ja klassifitseerimise puhul F1 skoorid 37,4 ja 33,6 iga faasi kohta. Meie süsteem on jagatud ülesande kõigis kolmes alamülesandes kolmandal kohal.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta el sistema SIRIUS-LTG-UiO per a la tasca 7 SemEval 2018 sobre l'extracció i la classificació de relacions Semàntiques en documents científics. Primer extreuem el camí de dependencia més curt (sdp) entre dues entitats, després introduïm una xarxa neural convolucional (CNN) que agafa l'incorporació de camí de dependencia més curt com entrada i fa clasificació de relacions amb objectius diferents per cada subterrània de la tasca compartida. Aquest enfocament va aconseguir puntuacions F1 globals de 76,7 i 83,2 per la classificació de relacions en dades netes i ruidoses, respectivament. A més, per l'extracció combinada de relacions i la classificació de dades netes, va obtenir puntuacions F1 de 37,4 i 33,6 per cada fase. El nostre sistema es classe en tercer lloc en les tres subtasques de la tasca compartida.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään SIRIUS-LTG-UiO-järjestelmä SemEval 2018 Task 7 on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers -julkaisussa. Ensin poimimme lyhimmän riippuvuusreitin (sdp) kahden entiteetin välillä, sitten esittelemme konvolutionaalisen neuroverkon (CNN), joka ottaa lyhimmän riippuvuusreitin upotukset syötteenä ja suorittaa suhdeluokittelun erilaisin tavoittein kunkin jaetun tehtävän alatehtävän osalta. Tämä lähestymistapa saavutti F1-kokonaispisteet 76,7 ja 83,2 puhtaiden tietojen suhdeluokituksessa. Lisäksi puhtaiden tietojen yhdistettyä suhdeuuttamista ja luokittelua varten se sai F1-pisteet 37,4 ja 33,6 kussakin vaiheessa. Järjestelmämme sijoittuu kolmanneksi yhteisen tehtävän kaikissa kolmessa osatehtävässä.', 'he': 'המאמר הזה מציג את מערכת SIRIUS-LTG-UiO עבור המשימה 7 של SemEval 2018 על מחלץ מערכות יחסים סמנטיות וסימון במסמכים מדעיים. קודם אנו חוטפים את מסלול התלויות הקצר ביותר (sdp) בין שתי יחידות, ואז אנו מכירים רשת עצבית משתנה (CNN) אשר לוקחת את מסלול התלויות הקצר ביותר תוכנית ומבצעת מערכת יחסים עם מטרות שונות לכל תחתונה של המשימה המשותפת. הגישה הזו השיגה נקודות F1 כלליות של 76.7 ו-83.2 עבור שיעור יחסים על נתונים נקיים ורעשים, בהתאם. Furthermore, for combined relation extraction and classification on clean data, it obtained F1 scores of 37.4 and 33.6 for each phase.  המערכת שלנו מגוונת בשלישית בכל שלושת התפקידים של המשימה המשותפת.', 'ha': "Wannan makala na gaya na tsarin Sirius-LTG-UiO wa the Semeval 2018 Tafiyar da 7 on Semantic Relation Extracti and Classification in Kayan Aiki. Kayyan da, Munã fitar da hanya mafi ƙaranci a tsakanin abubuwa biyu, sa'an nan kuma Mu introduce wata shirin neural na daidaita (CNN) wanda ke iya ƙaranci hanya masu ƙaranci da za'a shiga kuma ke sami darafõfi da abubuwa masu sãɓa wa duk aikin da ake raba shi. Wannan hanyor ya sami F1'ar nau'i na 76.7 da 83.2 wa classified na mazaɓa kan data na tsarkaka da yaye. Furan wannan, dõmin ka samu masu fitarwa da siffarwa a kan data mai tsari, sai ya sãmu F1 score na 37.4 da 33.6 kan kõwane fasa. Systeminmu na danganta uku a cikin dukkan aikin na rabon aiki uku.", 'sk': 'V članku je predstavljen sistem SIRIUS-LTG-UiO za nalogo 7 SemEval 2018 o ekstrakciji in klasifikaciji semantičnih odnosov v znanstvenih člankih. Najprej izvlečemo najkrajšo pot odvisnosti (sdp) med dvema entitetama, nato uvedemo konvolucijsko nevronsko omrežje (CNN), ki vzame najkrajšo vdelavo poti odvisnosti kot vhod in opravi klasifikacijo relacij z različnimi cilji za vsako podopravilo skupnega opravila. Ta pristop je dosegel skupno oceno F1 76,7 oziroma 83,2 za razvrstitev relacij na čistih in hrupnih podatkih. Poleg tega je za kombinirano ekstrakcijo relacij in klasifikacijo na čistih podatkih dobil oceno F1 37,4 in 33,6 za vsako fazo. Naš sistem se uvršča na 3. mesto v vseh treh podnalogah skupne naloge.', 'jv': 'Iki artiklo nggawe sistem SiRIus-LTG-UiO nggawe seminval 2020 task 7 nang semanti Relative extration lan kelas nang Sayensi Paper. Awak dhéwé butuh tanggal perusahaan (sdp) ingkang sampeyan isih durum, dadi nambah alam sing dibutuhke alam kuwi padha sing dibutuhke dipun-perusahaan (MT) sing wis nambah dhéwé, akeh iso nggawe basa sampeyan pangalan sing dibutuhke tarjamahan karo pakem nggawe basa sing dibutuhke tarjamahan. Ndoleh iki ditumpa akeh puntuang-puntuang kanggo sawasar F1 puntuang-puntuang, ditambang-puntuang kanggo kalagayaan karo perusahaan dumateng lan warna-warni. Label Sistem awak dhéwé ngerasai tanggal 3 ing telu-task lan ngawehi gedung', 'bo': 'འདིས་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་འདིས་ SIRIUS-LTG-UiO system for the SemEval 2018 Task 7 on Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers. First we extract the shortest dependency path (sdp) between two entities, then we introduce a convolutional neural network (CNN) which takes the shortest dependency path embeddings as input and performs the relationships classification with different objectives for each subtask of the shared task. This approach achieved overall F1 scores of 76.7 and 83.2 for relation to classification on clean and noisy data, respectively. Furthermore, for combined relation extraction and classification on clean data, it obtained F1 scores of 37.4 and 33.6 for each phase. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་གྱི་དོན་ལྟར་གསུམ་ལས་ཀ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གསུམ་ཡོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Texterra at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Exploiting Syntactic Information for Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'ar': 'تيكستيرا في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: استغلال المعلومات النحوية لاستخراج العلاقة وتصنيفها في الأوراق العلمية', 'fr': "Texterra au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Exploiter les informations syntaxiques pour l'extraction et la classification des relations dans les articles scientifiques", 'es': 'Texterra en SemEval-2018 Tarea 7: Explotación de la información sintáctica para la extracción y clasificación de relaciones en artículos científicos', 'pt': 'Texterra no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Explorando Informações Sintáticas para Extração e Classificação de Relações em Artigos Científicos', 'ja': 'Texterra at SemEval -2018タスク7 ：科学論文における関係抽出と分類のための構文情報の活用', 'zh': 'Texterra at SemEval-2018 任7:以句法信息,科学论文取类焉', 'ru': 'Texterra на SemEval-2018 Задача 7: Использование синтаксической информации для извлечения и классификации отношений в научных работах', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 में Texterra: वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में संबंध निष्कर्षण और वर्गीकरण के लिए वाक्यात्मक जानकारी का शोषण', 'ga': 'Texterra ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Leas a bhaint as Faisnéis Chomhréire le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh agus Aicmiú i bPáipéir Eolaíochta', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Εκμετάλλευση συντακτικών πληροφοριών για την εξαγωγή και ταξινόμηση σχέσεων σε επιστημονικές εργασίες', 'hu': 'Texterra a SemEval-2018 7. feladat: Szintaktikus információk kihasználása a kapcsolatok kivonására és osztályozására tudományos dolgozatokban', 'it': "Texterra a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Sfruttare le informazioni sintattiche per l'estrazione e la classificazione delle relazioni in documenti scientifici", 'lt': 'Texterra SemEval-2018 7 užduotis: Naudoti sintaktinę informaciją santykiams ekstrahuoti ir klasifikuoti moksliniuose dokumentuose', 'mk': 'Текстера на SemEval-2018 задача 7: Искористување на синтактички информации за екстракција и класификација на односите во научните документи', 'kk': '7- тапсырмасында текстера: Қатынасын тарқату мен классификациялау синтактикалық мәліметін зерттеу', 'ms': 'Texterra di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Menggunakan Maklumat Sintaktik untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan dan Klasifikasi dalam Dokumen Saintifik', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7- ലെ ടെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെര: ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Texterra f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7: L-isfruttar ta’ Informazzjoni Sintattika għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet u l-Klassifikazzjoni fid-Dokumenti Xjentifiċi', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 7: Хувь холбоотой гаргах болон Шинжлэх ухааны сонины шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухааны мэдээлэл', 'no': 'Texterra på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 7: Eksplosjon av syntaktiske informasjon for utpakking og klassifisering av relasjonar i vitenskapelige papir', 'sr': 'Tekstera na zadatku 7: Eksploziranje sintaktičkih informacija za izvlačenje odnosa i klasifikaciju u naučnim papirima', 'si': 'texterra at semeval-2018 Job 7: Exploiting Synact Info for Reference Extraction and Classication in science papers', 'pl': 'Zadanie 7: Wykorzystanie informacji syntaktycznych do ekstrakcji i klasyfikacji relacji w pracach naukowych', 'ro': 'Texterra la SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploatarea informațiilor sintactice pentru extragerea relațiilor și clasificarea în lucrările științifice', 'so': 'Texterra at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploding Syntactic information for Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'sv': 'Texterra på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Utnyttjande av syntaktisk information för relationsextraktion och klassificering i vetenskapliga artiklar', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 7: தொடர்பு வெளியேறுதல் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான தொடர்பு தகவல் வெளியிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 7 میں ٹاکس ترا: نسبت اخراج اور کلاسیفٹ کے لئے سینٹکتیک معلومات پھیلانے', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 7: Ilmiy Qogʻozlarida aloqa uzilish va klassification uchun Syntactic information Exploding', 'vi': 'Chữ thất ở SemEvl-208 Task 7: phát triển thông tin cú pháp để khai thác kết quả và phân tích trong các sách khoa học', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Използване на синтактична информация за извличане и класификация на отношенията в научни статии', 'nl': 'Texterra bij SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Het benutten van syntactische informatie voor relatieontwikkeling en classificatie in wetenschappelijke artikelen', 'da': 'Texterra på SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Udnyttelse af syntaktisk information til relationsudvinding og klassificering i videnskabelige papirer', 'ko': 'Textera가SemEval-18 임무7: 문법 정보를 이용하여 과학 논문에서의 관계 추출과 분류', 'de': 'Texterra at SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 7: Nutzung syntaktischer Informationen zur Beziehungsextraktion und Klassifizierung in wissenschaftlichen Aufsätzen', 'id': 'Texterra di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Menggunakan Informasi Sintaktik untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan dan Klasifikasi dalam Dokumen Sains', 'sw': 'Texterra kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 7: Kutumia taarifa za Mshinikiti kwa ajili ya Kutengeneza na Kutangaza kwa Makala ya Sayansi', 'tr': 'Texterra at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Syntactic Information for Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'sq': 'Texterra at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Syntactic Information for Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 7: Exploting Syntactic information for Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'af': 'Texterra by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 7: Verspreiding sintaktisies inligting vir verwante uitpakking en klassifikasie in Wetenskaplike Papiere', 'fa': 'Texterra at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Syntactic Information for Relations Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের টেক্স্টেরা: বৈজ্ঞানিক পত্রিকায় সংযোগ বিস্তারিত তথ্য প্রসারিত করা হচ্ছে', 'hr': 'Texterra na zadatku 7: Eksploziranje sintaktičkih informacija za izvlačenje odnosa i klasifikaciju u znanstvenim papirima', 'hy': 'TexTerra-ը, 2018-ի կիսագնդի 7. խնդիր. օգտագործել գիտական փաստաթղթերում գտնվող համակարգչային տեղեկատվությունը հարաբերությունների վերացման և դասակարգման համար', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 7: ńįliŇükil…ôrin …ôlaq…ôl…ôri √ßńĪxarńĪlmasńĪ v…ô Klasifikasyonu Sintaktik Mal√ľmatńĪ Exploiting in Scientific Papers', 'bs': 'Texterra na zadatku 7: Eksploziranje sintaktičkih informacija za izvlačenje odnosa i klasifikaciju u naučnim papirima', 'cs': 'Úkol 7: Využití syntaktických informací pro extrakci a klasifikaci vztahů ve vědeckých článcích', 'et': 'Texterra SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 7: Süntaktilise informatsiooni kasutamine seoste ekstraheerimiseks ja klassifitseerimiseks teaduslikes artiklites', 'fi': 'Texterra SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Syntaktiikan tiedon hyödyntäminen suhdeuuttamisessa ja luokittelussa tieteellisissä julkaisuissa', 'ca': 'Texterra a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Syntactic Information for Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'Texterra at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Syntactic Information for Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'sk': 'Texterra na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Izkoriščanje sintetičnih informacij za pridobivanje in klasifikacijo odnosov v znanstvenih člankih', 'bo': 'Texterra at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Exploiting Syntactic Information for Relation Extraction and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'ha': 'QShortcut'}
{'en': 'In this work we evaluate applicability of entity pair models and neural network architectures for relation extraction and classification in scientific papers at SemEval-2018. We carry out experiments with representing entity pairs through sentence tokens and through shortest path in dependency tree, comparing approaches based on convolutional and recurrent neural networks. With convolutional network applied to shortest path in dependency tree we managed to be ranked eighth in subtask 1.1 (clean data), ninth in 1.2 (noisy data). Similar model applied to separate parts of the shortest path was mounted to ninth (extraction track) and seventh (classification track) positions in subtask 2 ranking.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل نقوم بتقييم إمكانية تطبيق نماذج أزواج الكيانات وبنى الشبكات العصبية لاستخراج العلاقة وتصنيفها في الأوراق العلمية في SemEval-2018. نجري تجارب لتمثيل أزواج الكيانات من خلال رموز الجملة ومن خلال أقصر مسار في شجرة التبعية ، ومقارنة الأساليب القائمة على الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية والمتكررة. مع تطبيق الشبكة التلافيفية على أقصر مسار في شجرة التبعية ، تمكنا من الحصول على المرتبة الثامنة في المهمة الفرعية 1.1 ("البيانات النظيفة") ، والمرتبة التاسعة في 1.2 ("البيانات الصاخبة"). تم تطبيق نموذج مشابه تم تطبيقه على أجزاء منفصلة من أقصر مسار على الموضعين التاسع (مسار الاستخراج) والسابع (مسار التصنيف) في تصنيف المهمة الفرعية 2.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous évaluons l'applicabilité des modèles de paires d'entités et des architectures de réseaux neuronaux pour l'extraction et la classification de relations dans des articles scientifiques au SEMEVAL-2018. Nous réalisons des expériences de représentation de paires d'entités par des jetons de phrases et par le chemin le plus court dans l'arbre de dépendance, en comparant des approches basées sur des réseaux de neurones convolutifs et récurrents. Avec le réseau convolutif appliqué au chemin le plus court dans l'arbre de dépendance, nous avons réussi à nous classer huitième dans la sous-tâche 1.1 («\xa0nettoyer les données\xa0»), neuvième en 1.2 («\xa0données bruyantes\xa0»). Un modèle similaire appliqué à des parties distinctes du chemin le plus court a été monté à la neuvième (piste d'extraction) et à la septième position (piste de classification) dans le classement de la sous-tâche 2.", 'es': 'En este trabajo evaluamos la aplicabilidad de modelos de pares de entidades y arquitecturas de redes neuronales para la extracción y clasificación de relaciones en artículos científicos en SemEval-2018. Llevamos a cabo experimentos para representar pares de entidades a través de símbolos de oración y a través de la ruta más corta en el árbol de dependencias, comparando enfoques basados en redes neuronales convolucionales y recurrentes. Con la red convolucional aplicada a la ruta más corta en el árbol de dependencias, logramos ocupar el octavo lugar en la subtarea 1.1 («datos limpios»), el noveno en la 1.2 («datos ruidosos»). Un modelo similar aplicado a partes separadas de la ruta más corta se montó en las posiciones novena (pista de extracción) y séptima (pista de clasificación) en la clasificación de la subtarea 2.', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho avaliamos a aplicabilidade de modelos de pares de entidades e arquiteturas de redes neurais para extração e classificação de relações em artigos científicos no SemEval-2018. Realizamos experimentos com representação de pares de entidades por meio de tokens de sentença e por caminho mais curto em árvore de dependências, comparando abordagens baseadas em redes neurais convolucionais e recorrentes. Com a rede convolucional aplicada ao caminho mais curto na árvore de dependências conseguimos ficar em oitavo lugar na subtarefa 1.1 (“dados limpos”), nono em 1.2 (“dados ruidosos”). Modelo semelhante aplicado a partes separadas do caminho mais curto foi montado na nona (pista de extração) e na sétima (pista de classificação) posições no ranking da subtarefa 2.', 'ja': 'この研究では、SemEval -2018の科学論文における関係抽出と分類のためのエンティティペアモデルとニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャの適用性を評価する。我々は、文トークンを通じて、依存性ツリーの最短経路を通じて、エンティティペアを表す実験を行い、畳み込みおよび再帰的ニューラルネットワークに基づくアプローチを比較します。依存関係ツリーの最短経路に畳み込みネットワークを適用すると、サブタスク1.1 （「クリーンデータ」）で8位、1.2 （「ノイズの多いデータ」）で9位にランクされることができました。最短経路の別個の部分に適用された同様のモデルは、サブタスク2ランキングの9番目（抽出トラック）と7番目（分類トラック）の位置に取り付けられた。', 'zh': '于此论实体对模型与神经网络架构于SemEval-2018科学论文取类之适用性。 以句识之,与树中最短径以表其实,较之卷积递归神经网络之法。 因卷积网络应用于树中最短路径,设法于子务1.1("净数")中排名第八,于1.2("噪声数")中第九。 凡模用于最短径之独,在子务2列名中安装至第九(提取轨道)与第七(分类)位。', 'hi': 'इस काम में हम SemEval-2018 में वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में संबंध निष्कर्षण और वर्गीकरण के लिए इकाई जोड़ी मॉडल और तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर की प्रयोज्यता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम वाक्य टोकन के माध्यम से और निर्भरता पेड़ में सबसे छोटे पथ के माध्यम से इकाई जोड़े का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं, convolutional और आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के आधार पर दृष्टिकोण की तुलना करते हैं। निर्भरता पेड़ में सबसे कम पथ पर लागू convolutional नेटवर्क के साथ हम subtask 1.1 ("स्वच्छ डेटा") में आठवें स्थान पर रहने में कामयाब रहे, 1.2 में नौवें स्थान पर ("शोर डेटा")। सबसे छोटे पथ के अलग-अलग हिस्सों पर लागू समान मॉडल को सबटास्क 2 रैंकिंग में नौवें (निष्कर्षण ट्रैक) और सातवें (वर्गीकरण ट्रैक) पदों पर रखा गया था।', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы оцениваем применимость моделей пар сущностей и архитектур нейронных сетей для извлечения и классификации отношений в научных работах на SemEval-2018. Мы проводим эксперименты с представлением пар сущностей через токены предложений и через самый короткий путь в дереве зависимостей, сравнивая подходы, основанные на сверточных и рекуррентных нейронных сетях. Сверточная сеть, применяемая к кратчайшему пути в дереве зависимостей, позволила нам занять восьмое место в подзадаче 1.1 («чистые данные»), девятое место в 1.2 («шумные данные»). Аналогичная модель, применявшаяся к отдельным частям кратчайшего пути, была установлена на девятую (путь извлечения) и седьмую (путь классификации) позиции в подзадаче 2.', 'ga': "San obair seo déanaimid measúnú ar infheidhmeacht samhlacha péire aonáin agus ailtireachtaí líonraí néaracha maidir le heastóscadh agus rangú gaol i bpáipéir eolaíocha ag SemEval-2018. Déanaimid turgnaimh le hionadaíocht a dhéanamh ar phéirí aonán trí chomharthaí pianbhreithe agus tríd an gcosán is giorra sa chrann spleáchais, ag déanamh comparáide idir cur chuige atá bunaithe ar líonraí néaracha comhbheartaithe agus athfhillteacha. Agus líonra comhdhlúite curtha i bhfeidhm ar an gcosán is giorra sa chrann spleáchais d'éirigh linn a bheith rangaithe san ochtú háit i bhfothasc 1.1 (“sonraí glana”), naoú háit i 1.2 (“sonraí fuaimiúla”). Cuireadh samhail den chineál céanna a cuireadh i bhfeidhm ar chodanna ar leith den chosán is giorra sa naoú háit (rian astarraingthe) agus sa seachtú háit (rian aicmithe) i rangú fhothasc 2.", 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία αξιολογούμε τη δυνατότητα εφαρμογής μοντέλων ζευγαριών οντοτήτων και αρχιτεκτονικών νευρωνικών δικτύων για εξαγωγή και ταξινόμηση σχέσεων σε επιστημονικές εργασίες στο SemEval-2018. Πραγματοποιούμε πειράματα με την αναπαράσταση ζευγαριών οντοτήτων μέσω προτάσεων και μέσω της συντομότερης διαδρομής στο δέντρο εξάρτησης, συγκρίνοντας προσεγγίσεις βασισμένες σε σύνθετα και επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα. Με το πολύπλοκο δίκτυο που εφαρμόστηκε στο συντομότερο μονοπάτι στο δέντρο εξάρτησης καταφέραμε να καταταχθούμε όγδοοι στην υποταγή 1.1 ("καθαρά δεδομένα"), ένατοι στο 1.2 ("θορυβώδη δεδομένα"). Παρόμοιο μοντέλο που εφαρμόστηκε σε χωριστά τμήματα της συντομότερης διαδρομής τοποθετήθηκε σε ένατη (διαδρομή εξαγωγής) και έβδομη (διαδρομή ταξινόμησης) θέσεις στην κατάταξη δευτερεύουσας εργασίας 2.', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában az entitáspár modellek és neurális hálózati architektúrák alkalmazhatóságát értékeljük a kapcsolatok extrakciójára és osztályozására a SemEval-2018 tudományos tanulmányaiban. Kísérleteket végzünk az entitáspárok megjelenítésével mondatokon keresztül és a legrövidebb úton a függőségfában, konvuluációs és visszatérő neurális hálózatokon alapuló megközelítések összehasonlításával. A függőségi fa legrövidebb útjára alkalmazott konvolúciós hálózattal sikerült a nyolcadik helyre kerülnünk az 1.1. résztevékenységben ("tiszta adatok"), a kilencedik helyre jutnunk az 1.2. részben ("zajos adatok"). Hasonló modellt alkalmaztunk a legrövidebb útvonal különálló részeire a kilencedik (extraction track) és hetedik (osztályozási pálya) pozícióba a 2. részfeladat rangsorolásában.', 'ka': "ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ განსაზღვრებთ ინტერტიკო მადელების და ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურების პრობლექცია და კლასიფიკაცია მეცნიერო დომენტებში SemEval-2018-ში. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც განსაზღვრებას ინტერტიკური ზოგიები სიტყვების გამოყენებით და უკეთესი სიტყვების გამოყენებით, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულობის და რეკურა კონგულოციონალური ქსელი, რომელიც უკეთესი ნაკლები გზაზე გამოყენებულია დამხოლოების ხელში, ჩვენ შევაძლებელია დავწეროთ 8 წერტილი 1.1 წერტილი ('წაშლა მონაცემები'), 9 წერ მსგავსი მოდელი, რომელიც გაყოფილი ნაკლები გზის ნაწილი ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილი", 'it': "In questo lavoro valutiamo l'applicabilità dei modelli di coppia di entità e delle architetture di rete neurale per l'estrazione e la classificazione delle relazioni in articoli scientifici a SemEval-2018. Eseguiamo esperimenti con la rappresentazione di coppie di entità attraverso token di frase e attraverso il percorso più breve nell'albero delle dipendenze, confrontando approcci basati su reti neurali convoluzionali e ricorrenti. Con la rete convoluzionale applicata al percorso più breve nell'albero delle dipendenze siamo riusciti ad essere ottavi nella sottomissione 1.1 ('dati puliti'), noni in 1.2 ('dati rumorosi'). Modello simile applicato a parti separate del percorso più corto è stato montato alla nona (pista di estrazione) e settima (pista di classificazione) posizione nella sottomissione 2 classifica.", 'kk': "Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз бір бірлік үлгілер мен невралдық желінің архитектураларын шешу және ғылыми қағаздардың қатынасын шешу және шектеу үшін бағалаймыз. Біз тәуелсіздік ағашындағы ең қысқа жолды, конверсиялық және қайталанатын невралдық желілерде негізделген жағдайларды салыстырып тәжірибелерді көрсетедік. Тәуелсіздік ағашындағы ең қысқа жолына қолданылған желіміз 1. 1 ('тазалау деректері') асты сұраныстағы 8- жолы ('тазалау деректері') болды. Ең қысқа жолдың бөлшектеріне қолданылатын ұқсас үлгісі 9- ші (тарқату жолы) және 7- ші (classification track) орындарына 2- жолдың асты сұраныс орындарына тіркелді.", 'mk': "Во оваа работа ја проценуваме апликабилноста на моделите на пар ентитети и архитектурите на нервната мрежа за извлекување и класификација на односите во научните документи во SemEval-2018. We carry out experiments with representing entity pairs through sentence tokens and through shortest path in dependency tree, comparing approaches based on convolutional and recurrent neural networks.  Со конволуционалната мрежа аплицирана на најкраткиот пат во дрвото на зависноста успеавме да бидеме рангирани осмиот во подпрашањето 1.1 ('чисти податоци'), деветтиот во 1.2 ('бучни податоци'). Сличен модел аплициран на одделни делови од најкратката патека беше монтиран на деветата (трага за извлекување) и седмата (трага за класификација) позиција во рангирањето на подпрашањето 2.", 'lt': "Šiame darbe vertiname subjektų poros modelių ir nervinių tinklų architektūrų taikymą santykių gavybai ir klasifikacijai moksliniuose dokumentuose SemEval-2018. Atliekame eksperimentus su atstovaujančiais subjektų poromis per sakinių ženklus ir per trumpiausią priklausomybės medžio kelią, palygindami metodus, pagrįstus konvoliuciniais ir pasikartojančiais nerviniais tinklais. Kai konvoliucinis tinklas taikomas trumpiausiam priklausomybės medžio keliui, mums pavyko priskirti aštuntą paklausos 1.1 poskyryje ('švari duomenys'), devynioji 1.2 poskyryje ('triukšmingi duomenys'). Panašus modelis, taikomas atskiroms trumpiausio kelio dalims, buvo pritvirtintas prie devintosios (ekstrahavimo kelio) ir septintosios (klasifikavimo kelio) pozicijų 2 poskirsnyje.", 'ms': "Dalam kerja ini kami menilai kemudahan pasangan entiti model dan arkitektur rangkaian saraf untuk ekstraksi hubungan dan klasifikasi dalam kertas saintifik di SemEval-2018. Kami melakukan eksperimen dengan mewakili pasangan entiti melalui token kalimat dan melalui laluan paling pendek dalam pepohon dependensi, membandingkan pendekatan berdasarkan rangkaian saraf berkembang dan berkembang. Dengan rangkaian konvolutional dilaksanakan pada laluan paling pendek dalam pepohon dependensi kami berjaya dipilih ke-delapan dalam subtanya 1.1 ('data bersih'), ke-sembilan dalam 1.2 ('data bunyi'). Model yang sama dilaksanakan pada bahagian terpisah laluan yang paling pendek diletak ke kedudukan ke-sembilan (trek ekstraksi) dan ke-tujuh (trek klasifikasi) dalam rangkaian sub-tanya 2.", 'ml': "ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ലെ ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനിക്കുന്നതിനും സാമ്പത്തിക പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d ജ വാക്കിന്റെ ഒളിപ്പുകളിലൂടെയും ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷത്തിലൂടെയുള്ള ഏറ്റവും ചെറിയ വഴികളിലൂടെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന മരത്തിലെ ഏറ്റവും ചെറുതായ പാത പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന ശേഖരം 1. 1 ('ശുദ്ധ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d'), 1. 2-ല്\u200d ഒമ്പത്\u200c ('ശബ്ദ ഡാറ്റാ' എന്ന വിവരങ്ങളി ഏറ്റവും ചെറുതായ പാത്തിന്റെ ഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്ക് വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരേ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒമ്പതാമത്തേതിലേക്കും (പുറത്തെ", 'mt': "F’dan ix-xogħol aħna jevalwaw l-applikabbiltà ta’ mudelli ta’ par ta’ entitajiet u arkitetturi tan-netwerks newrali għall-estrazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet f’dokumenti xjentifiċi f’SemEval-2018. Għandna nagħmlu esperimenti b’pari ta’ entitajiet li jirrappreżentaw permezz ta’ tokens ta’ sentenza u permezz tal-iqsar mogħdija fis-siġar tad-dipendenza, li jqabblu approċċi bbażati fuq netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali u rikorrenti. B'netwerk konvoluzzjonali applikat għall-iqsar triq fis-siġar tad-dipendenza rnexxielna nkunu kklassifikati fit-tmien fis-sottomistoqsija 1.1 ('dejta nadifa'), id-disa' f'1.2 ('dejta storbjuża'). Similar model applied to separate parts of the shortest path was mounted to ninth (extraction track) and seventh (classification track) positions in subtask 2 ranking.", 'mn': "Энэ ажил дээр бид SemEval-2018 оны шинжлэх ухааны сонины холбоотой болон мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектуруудын хэрэгжүүлэлтийг үнэлдэг. Бид биетийн хоёр хоёрыг өгүүлбэр, хамааралтай модны хамгийн богино зам дээр илэрхийлэх туршилтуудыг хийдэг. Хамгийн богино зам дээр хэрэглэгдсэн холбоотой сүлжээнд бид 1.1 ('цэвэр өгөгдлийн'), 1.2-д 9-ийг ('чимээгүй өгөгдлийн') дотор 8-р зам авч чадсан. Хамгийн богино замын хэсгүүдэд адилхан загвар нь 9-р (тараах загвар) болон 7-р (дарааллын загвар) загвар 2-р дарааллаар суулгагдсан.", 'no': 'I dette arbeidet evaluerer vi tilgjengeligheten av einingspar-modeller og neuralnettverksarkitekturar for relasjon ekstrahering og klassifisering i vitenskapelige papir på semiEval-2018. Vi gjer eksperimenter med å representera einingspar gjennom setningsteikn og gjennom kortste bane i avhengighetstrået, samanliknar tilnærmingar basert på konvolusjonelle og rekursive neiralnettverk. Med konvolusjonelle nettverk som er brukt til kortste bane i avhengighetstreet, vart vi sett til å vera rankert åtte i underspørjinga 1,1 (« rein data »), ni i 1,2 (« støydata »). Likevel modell som er brukt til separe deler av den korteste banen er montert til nitte (ekstraksjonsspor) og syttende (klassifikasjonsspor) plasseringar i underspørjinga 2.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy oceniamy zastosowanie modeli par jednostek i architektur sieci neuronowych do ekstrakcji i klasyfikacji relacji w pracach naukowych na SemEval-2018. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty z reprezentowaniem par bytów za pomocą tokenów zdań i najkrótszej ścieżki w drzewie zależności, porównując podejścia oparte na konwolucyjnych i powtarzających się sieciach neuronowych. Dzięki sieci konwolucyjnej zastosowanej do najkrótszej ścieżki w drzewie zależności udało nam się zająć ósmym miejscem w podzadaniu 1.1 ("czyste dane"), dziewiątym w 1.2 ("szumowe dane"). Podobny model zastosowany do oddzielnych części najkrótszej ścieżki został zamontowany na dziewiątych (ścieżka ekstrakcyjna) i siódmych (ścieżka klasyfikacyjna) pozycjach w rankingu podzadania 2.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare evaluăm aplicabilitatea modelelor perechi de entități și a arhitecturilor de rețele neurale pentru extragerea și clasificarea relațiilor în lucrări științifice la SemEval-2018. Realizăm experimente cu reprezentarea perechilor de entități prin jetoane de propoziții și prin cea mai scurtă cale în arborele dependențelor, comparând abordările bazate pe rețele neuronale convoluționale și recurente. Cu rețeaua convoluțională aplicată pe cea mai scurtă cale în arborele dependențelor am reușit să fim pe locul opt în subsarcina 1.1 ("date curate"), al nouălea în 1.2 ("date zgomotoase"). Modelul similar aplicat părților separate ale celui mai scurt traseu a fost montat pe pozițiile a noua (pista de extracție) și a șaptea (pista de clasificare) în subsarcina 2 clasament.', 'sv': 'I detta arbete utvärderar vi tillämpningen av entitetspar modeller och neurala nätverksarkitekturer för relationsextraktion och klassificering i vetenskapliga artiklar på SemEval-2018. Vi utför experiment med att representera entitetspar genom meningstekens och genom kortaste väg i beroendeträd, jämföra tillvägagångssätt baserade på konvulutionella och återkommande neurala nätverk. Med konvulutivt nätverk tillämpat på kortaste vägen i beroendeträd lyckades vi hamna åttonde i subaktivitet 1.1 ("rena data"), nionde i 1.2 ("bullriga data"). Liknande modell som tillämpades på separata delar av den kortaste banan monterades till nionde (extraktionsspår) och sjunde (klassificeringsspår) positioner i subaktivitet 2 ranking.', 'sr': "U ovom poslu procjenjujemo primjenu modela par entiteta i arhitektura neuronske mreže za ekstrakciju i klasifikaciju odnosa u naučnim papirima na semiEval-2018. Provodimo eksperimente sa predstavljanjem parova entiteta kroz znakove rečenice i kroz najkraći put u drvetu zavisnosti, uspoređujući pristupe na osnovu konvolucionalnih i rekoretnih neuralnih mreža. Sa konvolucionalnom mrežom primjenom na najkraći put u drvetu zavisnosti uspjeli smo da postavimo osmi u podpitanju 1,1 ('čisti podaci'), deveti u 1,2 ('bučni podaci'). Sličan model koji je primjenjen na odvojene dijelove najkraćeg puta bio je montiran na deveti (ekstrakcioni trag) i sedmi (klasifikacijski trag) položaji u redovima podpitanja 2.", 'so': "In this work we evaluate applicability of entity pair models and neural network architectures for relation extraction and classification in scientific papers at SemEval-2018.  Waxaynu sameynaa imtixaamo ku qoran jireeno labo ah, calaamado kaliya iyo wado gaaban oo ku qoran geedka ku xiran, taas oo isbarbarbardhigta qaababka ku saleysan shabakado caadiga ah oo ku soo socda. Shabakadda caadiga ah waxaa lagu codsaday waddo gaaban oo geedka ku xiran, waxaana awoodnay in lagu sarrayo siddeedaad shabakad subxabsiga 1.1 ('data nadiifsan'), sagaalaadna 1.2 ('data noisy'). Tusaale u eg waxaa loo codsaday goobo gooni ah waddada ugu gaaban waxaa loo qaaday sagaalaad (jidadka soo saarista) iyo meeshooyinka toddobaad (kooxaha fasixiga) oo lagu safray subtashka 2.", 'ta': "இந்த வேலையில் நாம் பொருள் ஜோடி மாதிரிகளின் பயன்பாடுகளையும் பாதுகாப்பு வலைப்பின்னல் கட்டுப்பாடுகளையும் பரிசோதிக்கிறோம் செம்Ev We carry out experiments with representing entity pairs through sentence tokens and through shortest path in dependency tree, comparing approaches based on convolutional and recurrent neural networks.  சார்பு மரத்தில் சிறிய பாதையை சுருக்கும் பிணையமான பிணையம் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டால் நாம் துணை செயல் 1. 1 ('சுத்தமான தரவு), 1. 2 ல் ஒன்பது ('noisy data' அதே போன்ற மாதிரி சிறிய பாதையின் பகுதிகளை தனிப்பட்ட பகுதிகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது துணை செயல் 2 வரிசையில் ஒன்பது (பிரித்துச் செல", 'ur': "اس کام میں ہم ایک ٹیٹی کے جوڑے موڈل اور نیورل نیٹ ورک معماروں کی کاربردی کا ارزش کریں گے جو سائنس کاپورٹوں میں استخراج اور کلاسپیٹ کے لئے سائنس ویل-2018 میں ہے. ہم جسم ٹیکن کے ذریعہ ایک چیز جوڑوں کو نمایش دینے کے ساتھ آزمائش کر رہے ہیں اور کمترین مسیر کے ذریعہ سے مستقل درخت کے درخت کے ذریعہ سے، مذہب اور دوبارہ نمایش نیورل نیورل نیٹورک پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں. ہم نے 1.1 ('پاک ڈیٹا') میں آٹھواں رقم لیا تھا، 1.2 میں نیویں رقم لیا تھا۔ سیدھا موڈل جو چھوٹی راہ کے ٹکڑے ٹکڑوں پر لازم کیا گیا تھا نوں (اخراج ٹراک) اور ساتھی (کلاسپیٹ ٹراک) موقعیت دو رانڈ میں منٹ کی گئی تھی.", 'si': "මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ න්\u200dයූරල් ජාතික විද්\u200dයාපාරය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාපාරය සහ විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක පොත්ත අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ වාක්ෂාව ටොක්න් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සහ වාක්ෂාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ගස්සය සම්පූර්ණ ජාලය සමඟ අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් ගස්සයේ වැඩි කොටස් මාර්ගයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ අපි 1.1 ('සුදුසු දත්ත'), 1.2 ('සු සමාන මොඩල් භාවිතා වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් පැත්තක් වෙනුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් පැත්තක් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් 2 පැ", 'uz': "Bu ishda biz SemEval-2018 yildagi ilmiy qoʻllarda bog'liq chiqarish va nasifiyalash uchun ma'lum tarmoq muammolarni qiymatimiz. Biz tashkilotni tasdiqlash imtiyozlarini bir so'zlar yordamida qo'llashni bajaramiz va ishlatuvchi daraxtda qisqa yoʻl orqali bajaramiz, muammiy va davom tarmoqning asosida davom etishga murojaat qilamiz. Tarmoqni tasdiqlash darajadagi qisqa yoʻlni qoʻllashda, biz 1.1 (to ʻgʻri maʼlumot) dasturdagi sakkiz soʻzni soʻzda boshqarishga qaramay edik. Name", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp của các mô hình thực thể cặp và cấu trúc mạng thần kinh để phân tích các mối quan hệ trong các báo cáo khoa học tại SemEvol. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm đại diện cho các tổ chức qua các bản án và qua đường ngắn nhất trong cây độ phụ thuộc, so sánh các phương pháp dựa trên các mạng thần kinh liên kết và tái phát. Với mạng lưới kết nối được áp dụng cho đường ngắn nhất trong cây phụ thuộc, chúng tôi được xếp hạng thứ tám trong phần I.1.1 "dữ liệu sạch", thứ chín trong 1.2 "dữ liệu ồn ào". Mô hình tương tự được áp dụng cho các phần tách của đường ngắn nhất đã được nối tới đường chín (đường trích dẫn) và vị trí thứ bảy (đường phân hạng) theo cấp phụ đề 2.', 'bg': 'В тази работа се оценява приложимостта на модели за двойки обекти и архитектури на невронни мрежи за извличане и класификация на релации в научни статии на СемЕвал-2018. Извършваме експерименти с представяне на двойки същности чрез изречения и чрез най-кратък път в дървото на зависимостта, сравнявайки подходи, базирани на конволюционни и повтарящи се невронни мрежи. С конвелуционалната мрежа, приложена към най-краткия път в дървото на зависимостта, успяхме да бъдем осми в подзадача 1.1 ("чисти данни"), девети в 1.2 ("шумни данни"). Подобен модел, прилаган за отделни части от най-късия път, беше монтиран на девета (екстракционна коловоза) и седма (класификационна коловоза) позиция в подзадача 2.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde evaluerer vi anvendeligheden af entitetsparrsmodeller og neurale netværksarkitekturer til relationsudvinding og klassificering i videnskabelige artikler på SemEval-2018. Vi udfører eksperimenter med at repræsentere entitetspar gennem sætningsmokens og gennem korteste vej i afhængighedstræet, sammenligner tilgange baseret på konvulutive og tilbagevendende neurale netværk. Med konvulutionsnetværk anvendt til korteste vej i afhængighedstræet lykkedes det os at blive placeret ottende i subaktivitet 1.1 ("rene data"), niende i 1.2 ("støjende data"). Lignende model anvendt på separate dele af den korteste sti blev monteret til niende (ekstraktionsspor) og syvende (klassifikationspor) positioner i subaktivitet 2 rangering.', 'nl': "In dit werk evalueren we de toepasbaarheid van entiteitspaarmodellen en neurale netwerkarchitecturen voor relatieontwikkeling en classificatie in wetenschappelijke papers op SemEval-2018. We voeren experimenten uit met het vertegenwoordigen van entiteitsparen via zinstokens en via het kortste pad in de afhankelijkheidsboom, waarbij benaderingen worden vergeleken op basis van convolutionele en terugkerende neurale netwerken. Met convolutional netwerk toegepast op het kortste pad in dependence tree slaagden we erin om achtste te worden in subtaak 1.1 ('schone data'), negende in 1.2 ('noisy data'). Vergelijkbaar model toegepast op afzonderlijke delen van het kortste pad werd gemonteerd op negende (extractiespoor) en zevende (classificatiespoor) posities in subtaak 2 rangschikking.", 'de': "In dieser Arbeit evaluieren wir die Anwendbarkeit von Entitätspaarmodellen und neuronalen Netzwerkarchitekturen für Beziehungsextraktion und Klassifizierung in wissenschaftlichen Arbeiten an SemEval-2018. Wir führen Experimente mit der Darstellung von Entitätspaaren durch Satztoken und durch den kürzesten Pfad im Abhängigkeitsbaum durch und vergleichen Ansätze basierend auf convolutionalen und rezidivierenden neuronalen Netzwerken. Mit dem Convolutional Network, das auf den kürzesten Pfad im Abhängigkeitsbaum angewendet wurde, schafften wir es, in Subtask 1.1 ('saubere Daten'), Neunte in 1.2 ('Rauschdaten') auf Rang acht zu werden. Ähnliches Modell, das auf einzelne Teile des kürzesten Weges angewandt wurde, wurde an neunten (Extraktionsspur) und siebten (Klassifizierungsspur) Positionen in der Unteraufgabe 2 Rangliste montiert.", 'ko': "이 작업에서 우리는 실체가 모델과 신경 네트워크 구조가SemEval-18 과학 논문에서 관계 추출과 분류에 사용되는 적용성을 평가했다.우리는 문장 표기와 트리에 의존하는 가장 짧은 경로를 통해 실체가 맞다는 실험을 하고 권적신경망과 귀속신경망을 바탕으로 하는 방법을 비교했다.볼륨 네트워크를 트리에 의존하는 가장 짧은 경로에 적용한 결과 하위 작업 1.1('깨끗한 데이터')에서 8위, 1.2('시끄러운 데이터')에서 9위를 차지했다.가장 짧은 경로의 다른 부분에 적용되는 유사한 모델은 하위 작업 2 정렬의 9번 (추출 궤적) 과 7번 (분류 궤적) 위치에 설치되어 있습니다.", 'sw': "Katika kazi hii tunatathmini matumizi ya mifano miwili na majengo ya mtandao wa kiserikali kwa ajili ya utekelezaji na usambazaji katika karatasi za sayansi katika SemEval-2018. Tunafanya majaribio yenye kuwakilisha viwili kwa kupitia alama za hukumu na kupitia njia mpito kidogo katika mti wa kutegemea, ukilinganisha mbinu zinazotokana na mitandao ya kiserikali na yanayoendelea. Wakati mtandao wa utawala ulitumia njia mpya katika mti wa kutegemea, tuliweza kuwa na vyeo vya nane katika jukwaa la 1.1 ('data safi'), na tisa katika 1.2 ('data za sauti'). Mfano huo ulitumika katika sehemu tofauti za barabara ndogo ulipangwa hadi nafasi ya tisa (njia ya kutengeneza) na nafasi ya saba (njia ya usambazaji) katika nafasi ya subira 2.", 'hr': "U ovom poslu procjenjujemo primjenu modela i arhitektura neuronske mreže za ekstrakciju i klasifikaciju odnosa u znanstvenim papirima na semiEval-2018. Provodimo eksperimente s predstavljanjem parova entiteta kroz znakove rečenice i kroz najkraći put u drvetu zavisnosti, uspoređujući pristupe na temelju konvolucionalnih i rekonstruiranih neuralnih mreža. S konvolucionalnom mrežom primjenom na najkraći put u drvetu zavisnosti uspjeli smo biti osmog reda u podpitanju 1,1 ('čisti podaci'), deveti u 1,2 ('bučni podaci'). Sličan model koji je primjenjen na odvojene dijelove najkraćeg puta bio je montiran na devetoj (ekstrakcijski trag) i sedmu (klasifikacijski trag) položaja u redovima podpitanja 2.", 'fa': 'در این کار ما قابلیت کاربردی از مدل جفت و معماری شبکه عصبی برای اخراج و برقرار رابطه در کاغذهای علمی در نیم Eval-2018 ارزیابی می کنیم. ما آزمایش\u200cها را با نمایش جفت\u200cها از طریق نشانه\u200cهای جمله و از طریق کوتاه\u200cترین مسیر درخت بستگی انجام می\u200cدهیم، با مقایسه کردن روش\u200cهایی بر روی شبکه\u200cهای عصبی\u200cهای معمولی و تکرار می\u200cکنند. با شبکه\u200cهای کنترل برای کوتاهی\u200cترین مسیر در درخت بستگی کاربرد می\u200cکردیم که در زیر سوال ۱.۱ («داده\u200cهای پاک») نهمین در ۱.۲ («داده\u200cهای صوتی») درجات هشتمین درجات می\u200cیابیم. مدل شبیه به بخش\u200cهای کوتاه\u200cترین مسیر به نقطه\u200cهای نهم (نقطه\u200cی اخراج) و هفتم (نقطه\u200cی classification) در نقطه\u200cهای زیر سوال ۲ متصل شده است.', 'tr': "Bu işde SemEval-2018'de bir zat çift modelleriniň we neural network arhitekterileriniň alynyşlygyny çykarmak we klasifikasy bilen meňzeşliklerini çykarýarys. Biz sözlem işaretlerini, bağlılık agajynda iň kiçi yoldan, birbirlerini eşitleýän we tekrarly nöral şebekelere dayanan metodlaryny karşılaştyrýarys. Maksad agaçlaryň iň kiçi ýoldan soňra ulanylýan syýal bilen 1.1 ('arassa maglumat') asty ýoldan 8-nji dereje girdi we 1.2-de 9-nji dereje girdi. Iň kiçi yollaryň böleklerine ýakyn nusga 2 setir derejesinde döredildi.", 'af': "In hierdie werk evalueer ons toepassingbaarheid van entiteite paar modele en neuralnetwerk arkitektuure vir verwanting van uitpakking en klasifikasie in wetenskaplike papiere by SemEval-2018. Ons uitvoer eksperimente met verteenwoordigheid van entiteite paar deur settokens en deur kortste pad in afhanklikheidsboom, vergelyking van toepassings gebaseer op konvolusiele en herhaalde neuralnetwerke. Met konvolusiele netwerk toepassing na kortste pad in afhanklikheidsboom het ons bestuur om agtste in subvra 1. 1 ('skoon data'), negende in 1. 2 ('klankdatum'). Likelike model toewend na skiedende dele van die kortste pad was gekoppel na negende (uitpakking snit) en sewende (klasifikasie snit) posisies in onderspreek 2 rangering.", 'sq': "Në këtë punë ne vlerësojmë aplikabilitetin e modeleve të çifteve të njësisë dhe arkitekturave të rrjetit nervor për nxjerrjen e lidhjeve dhe klasifikimin në letrat shkencore në SemEval-2018. We carry out experiments with representing entity pairs through sentence tokens and through shortest path in dependency tree, comparing approaches based on convolutional and recurrent neural networks.  With convolutional network applied to shortest path in dependency tree we managed to be ranked eighth in subtask 1.1 ('clean data'), ninth in 1.2 ('noisy data').  Similar model applied to separate parts of the shortest path was mounted to ninth (extraction track) and seventh (classification track) positions in subtask 2 ranking.", 'am': "በዚህ ሥራ የሁለት ዓይነት ሞላቶች እና የናቡር መረብ መሠረት መሠረት እና በሳይንቀሳዊ ወረቀቶች ውስጥ ለመውጣት እና ለመለያየት እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ አካል ሁለት ዓይነቶችን በማሳየፍ ምልክቶች እና በተደገመ ዛፍ ላይ በሚያሳየው መንገድን እናደርጋለን፡፡ 1.1 ('ንጹሕ ዳታ'), ዘጠኝ በ1.2 ('ድምፅ data') በመስኮት ስምንተኛውን በመስመር ላይ ለመቀላቀል ተደረገ፡፡ በመስኮት 2 ክፍል ላይ የተጠቃሚ መንገድን ወደ ዘጠኝ (የመውጫው እቅድ) እና ወደ ሰባተኛው (የክፍለ መጠቀሚያ) ክፍሎች በተለየ ሞዴል ተጨማሪ ነበር።", 'bn': "এই কাজে আমরা বৈজ্ঞানিক কাগজে সেমভাল-২০১৮-এ সম্পর্ক নির্বাচন এবং বিজ্ঞানিক কাগজের জন্য প্রয়োজনীয়তা এবং নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক কেটের কাঠামো এবং  আমরা শাস্তির প্রতিনিধিত্বের মাধ্যমে প্রতিনিধিত্বিত বস্তুর জোড়া এবং নির্ভরশীল গাছের মাধ্যমে সংক্ষিপ্ত পথের মাধ্যমে পরীক্ষা করি, যা  With convolutional network applied to shortest path in dependency tree we managed to be ranked eighth in subtask 1.1 ('clean data'), ninth in 1.2 ('noisy data').  সংক্ষিপ্ত পথের সর্বোচ্চ অংশ বিভিন্ন অংশের জন্য একই ধরনের মডেল প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছিল। সাবটাস ২ রেঙ্কিং-এ সাতটি (বিনিময় ট্র্যাক) এবং স", 'hy': "Այս աշխատանքում մենք գնահատում ենք էության զույգ մոդելների և նեյրոնային ցանցի ճարտարապետությունների կիրառելիությունը հարաբերությունների վերացման և դասակարգման համար գիտական թղթերում, Սեմեվալ 2018 թվականին: We carry out experiments with representing entity pairs through sentence tokens and through shortest path in dependency tree, comparing approaches based on convolutional and recurrent neural networks.  Համախուսական ցանցը կիրառվում է կախվածության ծառի ամենակարճ ուղղությամբ, մենք կարողացանք 8-րդ դասակարգվել 1.1 ('մաքուր տվյալներ') ենթահարցում, 9-րդ՝ 1.2 ('աղմկոտ տվյալներ'): Նմանատիպ մոդելը, որը կիրառվում է ամենակարճ ճանապարհի առանձին մասերի վրա, տեղադրվել է իններորդ (հանման ճանապարհի) և եօթներորդ (դասակարգման ճանապարհի) դիրքերի 2 ենթահարցի դասակարգման մեջ:", 'id': "Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengevaluasi aplikabilitas pasangan model entitas dan arsitektur jaringan saraf untuk ekstraksi hubungan dan klasifikasi dalam kertas ilmiah di SemEval-2018. We carry out experiments with representing entity pairs through sentence tokens and through shortest path in dependency tree, comparing approaches based on convolutional and recurrent neural networks.  Dengan jaringan konvolusi yang diterapkan pada jalan terpendek di pohon dependensi kami berhasil menjadi peringkat delapan dalam subtask 1.1 ('data bersih'), sembilan dalam 1.2 ('data bunyi'). Similar model applied to separate parts of the shortest path was mounted to ninth (extraction track) and seventh (classification track) positions in subtask 2 ranking.", 'ca': "En aquest treball evaluem l'aplicabilitat de models de parell d'entitats i arquitectures de xarxa neural per a l'extracció de relacions i la classificació en articles científics a SemEval-2018. Fem experiments amb representar parelles d'entitats a través de fitxes de frases i de camí més curt en l'arbre de dependencia, comparant abords basats en xarxes neurals convolutives i recurrents. Amb la xarxa convolutiva aplicada al camí més curt de l'arbre de dependencia vam aconseguir ser classificats en la vuit posició en la subpregunta 1.1 ('dades netes'), en la nou posició en 1.2 ('dades sorolloses'). Un model similar aplicat a parts separades del camí més curt va ser montat a les posicions nou (pista d'extracció) i séptima (pista de classificació) en la subpregunta 2.", 'az': "Bu işlərdə biz bir şey çift modeli və nöral ağ arhitektarının uyğunluğunu SemEval-2018-də elmi kağıtlarında əlaqələr çıxartmaq və klasifikasyon üçün değerlendiririk. Biz cümlələr işarələrindən və bağımlılıq ağacının ən qısa yolundan təşkil edən, konvolucional və tekrar nöral ağaclarına dayanan approach ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Bağımsızlıq ağacının ən qısa yoluna uyğunlanan konvolucional ağ ilə 1.1 ('təmiz məlumatlar'), 1.2 içində doqquz dərəcədə səkkiz dərəcədə qaldıq ('səs məlumatları'). Ən qısa yolun ayrı parçalarına uyğulanmış kimi modellər doqquz (çıxarma parçasına) və yeddi (klasifikasiya parçasına) 2 dərəcədə bağlanmışdır.", 'bs': "U ovom poslu procjenjujemo primjenu modela par entiteta i arhitektura neuronske mreže za ekstrakciju i klasifikaciju odnosa u naučnim papirima na semiEval-2018. Proizvodimo eksperimente sa predstavljanjem parova entiteta kroz znakove rečenice i kroz najkraći put u drvetu zavisnosti, uspoređujući pristupe na osnovu konvolucionalnih i ponovnih neuralnih mreža. S konvolucionalnom mrežom primjenom na najkraći put u drvetu zavisnosti uspjeli smo biti osmog reda u podpitanju 1,1 ('čisti podaci'), devetom u 1,2 ('bučni podaci'). Sličan model koji je primjenjen na odvojene dijelove najkraćeg puta bio je montiran na deveti (ekstrakcioni trag) i sedmi (klasifikacijski trag) položaja u redovima podpitanja 2.", 'cs': "V této práci hodnotíme aplikaci modelů entitních párů a architektur neuronových sítí pro extrakci a klasifikaci vztahů ve vědeckých článcích na SemEval-2018. Provádíme experimenty s reprezentací párů entit prostřednictvím tokenů vět a nejkratší cestou v závislostním stromě, porovnáváme přístupy založené na konvolučních a recidivujících neuronových sítích. S konvoluční sítí aplikovanou na nejkratší cestu ve stromu závislostí jsme se podařilo dostat osmé místo v podúkolu 1.1 ('čistá data'), deváté v 1.2 ('šumová data'). Podobný model aplikovaný na jednotlivé části nejkratší cesty byl namontován na deváté (extrakční trať) a sedmé (klasifikační trať) pozice v podúkolu 2.", 'et': 'Selles töös hindame olemipaari mudelite ja neuraalvõrgu arhitektuuride rakendatavust seoste ekstraheerimiseks ja klassifitseerimiseks SemEval-2018 teaduslikes artiklites. Teostame eksperimente olemipaaride esindamisega lausemärkide kaudu ja sõltuvuspuu lühima tee kaudu, võrreldes konvolutsioonilistel ja korduvatel närvivõrkudel põhinevaid lähenemisviise. Konvolutsioonivõrgu rakendamisel sõltuvuspuu lühimale teele õnnestus meil olla alaülesandes 1.1 ("puhtad andmed") kaheksandal kohal, 1.2 ("mürakad andmed") üheksandal kohal. Sarnane mudel, mida kohaldati lühima tee eraldi osade suhtes, paigaldati 2. alamülesande järjekorras üheksandale (ekstraheerimisrada) ja seitsmendale (klassifitseerimisrada).', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä arvioimme entiteettiparimallien ja hermoverkkoarkkitehtuurien soveltuvuutta relaatioiden poimimiseen ja luokitteluun SemEval-2018:n tieteellisissä julkaisuissa. Teemme kokeita entiteettiparien esittämisestä lausemerkkien ja riippuvuuspuun lyhimmän polun kautta vertaamalla konvolutionaalisiin ja toistuviin neuroverkkoihin perustuvia lähestymistapoja. Riippuvuuspuun lyhyimmälle polulle sovellettaessa konvolutionaalista verkkoa onnistuimme sijoittumaan kahdeksanneksi alatehtävässä 1.1 ("puhdas data"), yhdeksänneksi 1.2 ("meluisa data"). Vastaava malli, jota sovellettiin lyhimmän reitin erillisiin osiin, asennettiin yhdeksännelle (uuttorata) ja seitsemännelle (luokittelurata) sijalle alatehtävässä 2.', 'ha': "Daga wannan aikin, Munã ƙaddara shirin ayuka na masu misãlai biyu da tsarin jerin masu tsari ga masu nuna da kuma rarrabẽwa cikin takardar masu sani a SemEal-2018. Munã jarraba jarrabo da ke wakilisha mazaɓa biyu a bayan alama na azãba, kuma da hanya kaɗan a cikin itãcen da ke dõgara, yana sami matsayi a kan zane-zane na'urar da ke dace. Wata shawarar da ɗabi'a sun yi amfani da hanya mafi ƙaranci cikin itãce ta dõgara, an buƙata mu zama randin takwas ɗin a cikin sub-aikin 1.1 ('data tsarkakakku'), na sakan cikin 1.2 ('voice data'). Kuma misali mai daidaita na applied dõmin a rarraba sãshen hanya masu ƙaranci da aka ɗau zuwa wurin na uku (jerin zararwa) da kuma wurin sabwai (jerin classified) cikin ranar aikin 2.", 'sk': 'V tem delu smo ocenili uporabnost modelov za par entitet in arhitektur nevronskih omrežij za ekstrakcijo relacij in klasifikacijo v znanstvenih člankih na SemEval-2018. Izvajamo eksperimente s predstavljanjem parov entitet preko stavkovnih žetonov in skozi najkrajšo pot v drevesu odvisnosti, pri čemer primerjamo pristope, ki temeljijo na konvolucionalnih in ponavljajočih se nevronskih omrežjih. Z uporabo konvolucionalnega omrežja za najkrajšo pot v drevesu odvisnosti smo uspeli postati osmo v podnalogi 1.1 ("čisti podatki"), deveto v 1.2 ("hrupni podatki"). Podoben model, uporabljen za ločene dele najkrajše poti, je bil nameščen na deveto mesto (ekstrakcijska steza) in sedmo mesto (klasifikacijska steza) v razvrstitvi podnaloge 2.', 'jv': 'Nang gawar iki, kita dejaragi aplikasi babagan model sampeyan karo netujar architectures kanggo nggambar extration lan kelas barang sampeyan tapi Sayensi nang semi-2011. Awak dhéwé éntuk Kernel konvolution Samsul', 'bo': 'In this work we evaluate applicability of entity pair models and neural network architectures for relation to extraction and classification in scientific papers at SemEval-2018. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། དབུགས་ཆ་སྐྱེས་པའི་མཐུད་སྣང་ཚོར་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཚུད་དང་། མཉམ་སྦྲགས Similar model applied to separate parts of the shortest path was mounted to ninth (extraction track) and seventh (classification track) positions in subtask 2 ranking.', 'he': "בעבודה הזו אנו מעריכים את היכולת של דוגמנים של זוגות יחידות וארכיטקטורות רשת עצביות עבור חיפוש מערכות יחסים וסיפור במסמכים מדעיים ב-SemEval-2018. אנחנו מבצעים ניסויים עם מייצג זוגות יחידות דרך סימני משפט ובדרך הדרך הקצרה ביותר בעץ התלויות, להשוות גישות מבוססות על רשתות עצביות משתנות ומחזרות. עם רשת משתנה מופעלת לנתיב הקצר ביותר בעץ התלויות הצלחנו להיות מוצבים בשמישי בשאלה 1.1 ('נתונים נקיים'), תשעי ב-1.2 ('נתונים רעשים'). דוגמנית דומה שהשתמשה לחלקים נפרדים של המסלול הקצר ביותר הורכבה לתשיעי (מסלול החילוץ) ומקומות שבעיים"}
{'en': 'UniMa at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'ar': 'UniMa في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: استخراج العلاقات الدلالية وتصنيفها من المنشورات العلمية', 'pt': 'UniMa no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Extração e Classificação de Relações Semânticas de Publicações Científicas', 'es': 'UniMA en SemEval-2018 Tarea 7: Extracción y clasificación de relaciones semánticas a partir de publicaciones científicas', 'fr': "L'UNIMA au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Extraction de relations sémantiques et classification à partir de publications scientifiques", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のUniMaタスク7 ：科学出版物からの意味関係の抽出と分類', 'zh': 'UniMa at SemEval-2018 任7:取语义于科学出版物', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 पर UniMa: वैज्ञानिक प्रकाशनों से शब्दार्थ संबंध निष्कर्षण और वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'UniMa на SemEval-2018 Задача 7: Извлечение семантической связи и классификация из научных публикаций', 'ga': 'UniMa ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Eastóscadh an Chaidrimh Shéimeantaigh agus Aicmiú ó Fhoilseacháin Eolaíoch', 'ka': 'Unima semiEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'hu': 'UniMa a SemEval-2018 7. feladat: Szemantikus viszonyok kivonása és osztályozása tudományos kiadványokból', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Εξόρυξη και ταξινόμηση σημασιολογικών σχέσεων από επιστημονικές εκδόσεις', 'it': 'UniMa al SemEval-2018 Task 7: Estrazione e classificazione della relazione semantica da pubblicazioni scientifiche', 'lt': 'Unima 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 7 užduotis: Semantinių santykių ekstrahavimas ir klasifikavimas iš mokslinių leidinių', 'ms': 'UniMa di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Ekstraksi Hubungan Semantic dan Klasifikasi dari Penerbitan Saintifik', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7: ശാസ്ത്ര പ്രചരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'kk': 'Юнима 7- жарым Eval- 2018 тапсырмасында: ғылыми публикациялардан Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification', 'mk': 'Унима на SemEval-2018 задача 7: Екстракција и класификација на семантичните односи од научните објавувања', 'mt': 'UniMa at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'pl': 'UniMa w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 7: Ekstrakcja i klasyfikacja relacji semantycznych z publikacji naukowych', 'ro': 'UniMa la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 7: Extragerea relațiilor semantice și clasificarea din publicații științifice', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'si': 'Unima at semeval-2018 Job 7: semantic Reference Extraction and Classication from science Public', 'no': 'Unima ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 7: Semantisk utpakking og klassifering frå vitenskapelige publikasjonar', 'so': 'Unima at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publishes', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 7: அறிவியல் பொருளிலிருந்து செம்மன்டிக் தொடர்பு பிரித்தல் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'sr': 'Unima na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: ekstrakcija i klasifikacija semantičkih odnosa iz naučnih publikacija', 'sv': 'UniMa på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Semantisk relation utvinning och klassificering från vetenskapliga publikationer', 'ur': 'سائنسویل-2018 ٹاکس 7 میں یونیما: سائنسیٹی رابطہ اخراج اور کلاسیفٹ', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 7: Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publication', 'vi': 'UniMa tại SemEvl-208 Task 7: Triển lãm và phân bổ từ những tác phẩm khoa học', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Извличане и класификация на семантична връзка от научни публикации', 'nl': 'UniMa bij SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Semantische Relatie Extractie en Classificatie uit Wetenschappelijke Publicaties', 'de': 'UniMa at SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 7: Semantische Beziehungsextraktion und Klassifizierung aus wissenschaftlichen Publikationen', 'id': 'UniMa at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 7: 과학 출판물에서 의미 관계 및 분류 추출', 'da': 'UniMa på SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Uddrag og klassificering af semantiske relationer fra videnskabelige publikationer', 'hr': 'Unima na zadatku 7: izvlačenje i klasifikacija semantičkih odnosa iz znanstvenih publikacija', 'fa': 'Unima at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relations Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'sw': 'UniMa kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 7: Utoa wa Kuhusiana na Kutangaza kwa Makala ya Sayansi', 'tr': 'Unima at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'af': 'Unima by SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Semantiese Relasie Uitpakking en Klassifikasie van Wetenskaplike Publikasie', 'sq': 'UniMa në SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৭: বৈজ্ঞানিক প্রকাশনা থেকে সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক বিদেশ এবং ক্লাসিফেশন', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publictions', 'hy': 'UniMa at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'ca': 'UniMa a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications', 'bs': 'Unima na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: ekstrakcija i klasifikacija semantičkih odnosa iz znanstvenih publikacija', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 7: Bilimsel Yazılımlardan Semantik İlişki Çıqış və Klasifikat', 'cs': 'Úkol 7: Extrakce a klasifikace sémantických vztahů z vědeckých publikací', 'et': 'UniMa SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 7: Semantilise seose väljavõtmine ja klassifitseerimine teadusväljaannetest', 'fi': 'UniMa SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Semanttisen suhteen poiminta ja luokittelu tieteellisistä julkaisuista', 'he': 'Unima ב SemEval-2018 משימה 7: מחלץ מערכת יחסים סמנטית וסימון מפרסמות מדעיות', 'sk': 'UniMa na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Izvleček in klasifikacija semantičnih odnosov iz znanstvenih publikacij', 'ha': 'QUniMa at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 7: Semantic Relation Extration and Classification from Cilmi Publishing', 'jv': 'Unima at semebal-2013 task 7: semanti c Relation extract and CLSSification from Sayensive Publications', 'bo': 'Unima at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relation Extraction and Classification from Scientific Publications'}
{'en': 'Large repositories of scientific literature call for the development of robust methods to extract information from scholarly papers. This problem is addressed by the SemEval 2018 Task 7 on extracting and classifying relations found within scientific publications. In this paper, we present a feature-based and a deep learning-based approach to the task and discuss the results of the system runs that we submitted for evaluation.', 'ar': 'تتطلب المستودعات الكبيرة للأدب العلمي تطوير أساليب قوية لاستخراج المعلومات من الأوراق العلمية. تمت معالجة هذه المشكلة في SemEval 2018 Task 7 حول استخراج العلاقات الموجودة في المنشورات العلمية وتصنيفها. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نهجًا قائمًا على الميزات وقائمًا على التعلم العميق للمهمة ونناقش نتائج تشغيل النظام الذي قدمناه للتقييم.', 'pt': 'Grandes repositórios de literatura científica exigem o desenvolvimento de métodos robustos para extrair informações de artigos acadêmicos. Esse problema é abordado pela Tarefa 7 do SemEval 2018 sobre extração e classificação de relações encontradas em publicações científicas. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma abordagem baseada em recursos e uma abordagem baseada em aprendizado profundo para a tarefa e discutimos os resultados das execuções do sistema que enviamos para avaliação.', 'es': 'Los grandes depósitos de literatura científica requieren el desarrollo de métodos sólidos para extraer información de artículos académicos. Este problema se aborda en la Tarea 7 de SemEval 2018 sobre la extracción y clasificación de las relaciones que se encuentran dentro de las publicaciones científicas. En este documento, presentamos un enfoque basado en funciones y un enfoque basado en el aprendizaje profundo para la tarea y discutimos los resultados de las ejecuciones del sistema que enviamos para su evaluación.', 'fr': "Les grands dépôts de littérature scientifique nécessitent le développement de méthodes robustes pour extraire des informations d'articles savants. Ce problème est abordé par la tâche 7 du SemEval 2018 sur l'extraction et la classification des relations trouvées dans les publications scientifiques. Dans cet article, nous présentons une approche basée sur les fonctionnalités et l'apprentissage profond de la tâche et discutons des résultats des exécutions du système que nous avons soumises pour évaluation.", 'ja': '科学文献の大規模なリポジトリでは、学術論文から情報を抽出するための堅牢な方法の開発が求められている。この問題は、科学的出版物に見られる関係の抽出と分類に関するSemEval 2018タスク7で取り上げられている。本稿では、課題に対する特徴ベースの深層学習ベースのアプローチを提示し、評価のために提出したシステム実行の結果について考察する。', 'zh': '大科学文献库开强术以取信于学术论文。 SemEval 2018事7决,7及科学出版物类。 本文,我们出了一种特征和深度学习的务术,并讨论了我们提交评估的系统运行。', 'hi': 'वैज्ञानिक साहित्य के बड़े भंडार विद्वानों के कागजात से जानकारी निकालने के लिए मजबूत तरीकों के विकास के लिए कहते हैं। इस समस्या को वैज्ञानिक प्रकाशनों के भीतर पाए जाने वाले संबंधों को निकालने और वर्गीकृत करने पर SemEval 2018 कार्य 7 द्वारा संबोधित किया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम कार्य के लिए एक सुविधा-आधारित और एक गहरी सीखने-आधारित दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं और सिस्टम रन के परिणामों पर चर्चा करते हैं जो हमने मूल्यांकन के लिए प्रस्तुत किए थे।', 'ru': 'Большие хранилища научной литературы требуют разработки надежных методов извлечения информации из научных работ. Эта проблема решается в рамках задачи 7 SemEval 2018 по извлечению и классификации отношений, найденных в научных публикациях. В этом документе мы представляем функциональный и основанный на глубоком обучении подход к задаче и обсуждаем результаты системных запусков, которые мы представили для оценки.', 'ga': 'Éilíonn stórtha móra den litríocht eolaíoch go bhforbrófar modhanna láidre chun faisnéis a bhaint as páipéir léannta. Tugtar aghaidh ar an bhfadhb seo le Tasc SemEval 2018 7 maidir le caidreamh a fhaightear laistigh d’fhoilseacháin eolaíocha a bhaint agus a rangú. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair cur chuige gné-bhunaithe agus domhainfhoghlama don tasc agus pléimid torthaí na ritheanna córais a chuireamar isteach le haghaidh meastóireachta.', 'hu': 'A tudományos irodalom nagy tárolói erőteljes módszerek kidolgozását igénylik a tudományos tanulmányokból származó információk kivonására. Ezt a problémát a tudományos publikációkban található kapcsolatok kinyerésével és osztályozásával foglalkozó SemEval 2018 Task 7 foglalkozik. Ebben a tanulmányban egy funkcióalapú és mélytanuláson alapuló megközelítést mutatunk be a feladathoz, és megvitatjuk az értékelésre benyújtott rendszerfuttatások eredményeit.', 'ka': 'მეცნიერო ლიტებერტიის დიდი რეპოზიტორიები უნდა ძალიან მეცნიერების განვითარება, რომ სწავლიერო დომენტიდან ინფორმაციის გამოკლება. ეს პრობლემა უცნობიერო პუბლემა 2018 წლის საქმე 7 დავალების გამოყენება და კლასიფიკაცია შესახებ, რომელიც მეცნიერო პუბლეციაში მოიძებნა. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მივიღეთ ფუნქციების და ძალიან სწავლების მიზეზი დავიწყებთ რაოდენობისთვის და განსხვავებთ სისტემის შედეგების შედეგები, რომლებიც ჩვენ გავამუშავეთ', 'kk': 'Ғылыми әдебиеттердің үлкен репозиториялары білім қағаздардан мәліметті тарқату үшін құпты әдістерді жасау үшін шақырылады. Бұл мәселе ғылыми шығармаларда табылған қатынастарды тарқату және классификациялау үшін 2018 жылдың жарым- жарым тапсырмасы бойынша шешілді. Бұл қағазда, біз тапсырманың негізінде және түсінікті оқытуға негізінде тәсілді, жүйенің нәтижесін оқу үшін тапсырманың нәтижесін талқылаймыз.', 'el': 'Μεγάλα αποθετήρια επιστημονικής βιβλιογραφίας απαιτούν την ανάπτυξη εύρωστων μεθόδων για την εξαγωγή πληροφοριών από επιστημονικές εργασίες. Το πρόβλημα αυτό αντιμετωπίζεται από το έργο για την εξαγωγή και ταξινόμηση των σχέσεων που βρίσκονται μέσα σε επιστημονικές δημοσιεύσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε χαρακτηριστικά και βαθιά μάθηση στην εργασία και συζητάμε τα αποτελέσματα των λειτουργιών του συστήματος που υποβάλαμε για αξιολόγηση.', 'lt': 'Didelės mokslinės literatūros saugyklos ragina parengti patikimus metodus, kuriais būtų galima gauti informaciją iš mokslinių dokumentų. Šią problem ą sprendžia 2018 m. SemEval 7 užduotis, susijusi su santykių išgavimu ir klasifikavimu moksliniuose leidiniuose. Šiame dokumente pristatome funkcijomis pagrįstą ir giliai mokomąjį požiūrį į užduotį ir aptariame sistemos rezultatus, kuriuos pateikėme vertinti.', 'it': "Grandi archivi di letteratura scientifica richiedono lo sviluppo di metodi robusti per estrarre informazioni da articoli accademici. Questo problema è affrontato dal Task 7 SemEval 2018 sull'estrazione e la classificazione delle relazioni trovate all'interno delle pubblicazioni scientifiche. In questo articolo, presentiamo un approccio basato sulle funzionalità e un approccio basato sull'apprendimento profondo al compito e discutiamo i risultati delle esecuzioni di sistema che abbiamo presentato per la valutazione.", 'ml': 'Large repositories of scientific literature call for the development of robust methods to extract information from scholarly papers.  ശാസ്ത്ര പ്രചരണങ്ങളില്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിച്ച ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുകയും വിശദീകരിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ കാര്യം സെമ്എ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തും ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കാനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു പ്രാധാന്യം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. നാം വ', 'ms': 'Repositori besar literatur saintifik memanggil pembangunan kaedah yang kuat untuk mengekstrak maklumat dari kertas sains. Masalah ini ditangani oleh SemEval 2018 Tugas 7 mengenai mengekstrak dan mengklasifikasi hubungan yang ditemui dalam penerbitan saintifik. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan berdasarkan ciri-ciri dan pendekatan berdasarkan belajar dalam untuk tugas dan membincangkan keputusan sistem berjalan yang kami hantar untuk penilaian.', 'mk': 'Големите складишта на научната литература повикуваат на развој на силни методи за извлекување информации од научните документи. Овој проблем е решен од Задачата СемЕвал 2018 7 за екстракција и класификација на односите пронајдени во научните публикации. Во овој документ, претставуваме пристап базиран на карактеристики и длабоко учење кон задачата и разговараме за резултатите на системот што го поднесовме за проценка.', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны уран зохиолын том хавтаснууд эрдэмтэн сэтгүүлээс мэдээллийг гаргахад хүчтэй арга замыг хөгжүүлэх шаардлагатай. Энэ асуудлыг шинжлэх ухааны нийтлэл дээр олсон харилцаа гаргаж, хичээлдэх талаар 2018 оны SemEval Task 7-ын зориулсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ажил дээр суралцах үндсэн, гүн гүнзгий суралцах арга замыг тайлбарлаж, үнэлгээ дэвшүүлэх системийн үр дүнг ярьж байна.', 'no': 'Stor lagerer av vitenskapelige literatur kallar for utvikling av robust metodar for å pakka ut informasjon frå forståande papir. Dette problemet er adressert av halvEval 2018 oppgåva 7 om utpakking og klassering av relasjonar funne i vitenskapelige publikasjonar. I denne papiret presenterer vi ein funksjonsbasert og ein dyp læringsbasert tilnærming til oppgåva og diskuterer resultatet av systemet køyrer som vi sendte for evaluering.', 'ro': 'Depozitele mari de literatură științifică necesită dezvoltarea unor metode solide de extragere a informațiilor din lucrările științifice. Această problemă este abordată de Task 7 SemEval 2018 privind extragerea și clasificarea relațiilor găsite în cadrul publicațiilor științifice. În această lucrare, prezentăm o abordare bazată pe caracteristici și o învățare profundă a sarcinii și discutăm rezultatele executărilor sistemului pe care le-am prezentat spre evaluare.', 'mt': 'Ir-repożitorji kbar tal-letteratura xjentifika jitolbu l-iżvilupp ta’ metodi robusti biex tiġi estratta l-informazzjoni minn dokumenti ta’ studju. Din il-problema hija indirizzata mis-SemEval 2018 Task 7 dwar l-estrazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet misjuba fil-pubblikazzjonijiet xjentifiċi. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw approċċ ibbażat fuq karatteristiċi u approċċ ibbażat fuq tagħlim profond għall-kompitu u niddiskutu r-riżultati tas-sistema li ressaqna għall-evalwazzjoni.', 'pl': 'Duże repozytoria literatury naukowej wymagają opracowania solidnych metod pozyskiwania informacji z prac naukowych. Problemem tym jest zadanie SemEval 2018 7 dotyczące ekstrakcji i klasyfikacji relacji znajdujących się w publikacjach naukowych. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy podejście do zadania oparte na funkcjach i głębokim uczeniu oraz omówimy wyniki działań systemowych, które przedstawiliśmy do oceny.', 'sv': 'Stora arkiv av vetenskaplig litteratur kräver utveckling av robusta metoder för att extrahera information från vetenskapliga artiklar. Detta problem behandlas i SemEval 2018 Task 7 om utvinning och klassificering av relationer som finns i vetenskapliga publikationer. I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett funktionsbaserat och djupinlärningsbaserat förhållningssätt till uppgiften och diskuterar resultaten av de systemkörningar som vi lämnat in för utvärdering.', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාත්මක සාක්ෂික සංවිධානයේ ලොකු සංවිධානයක් කියන්නේ ශක්තිමත් විද්\u200dයාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරකාශයක් වලින් හොයාගත්තා විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරකාශයක් වලින් සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200d මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධාරණය කරනවා සහ ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක', 'so': "Jardiinooyin waaweyn oo cilmiga la'aanta ah waxay u baahan yihiin horumarinta qaababka robust si ay macluumaadka uga soo saaraan warqadaha barashada. Dhibaatadan waxaa loola macaamiloodaa shaqo 7 ee SemEval 2018 ku saabsan soo bixinta iyo kala soocaynta xiriirka laga helay baaritaanka sayniska. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa qaab ku saleysan iyo qaab aad u dheer oo waxbarasho ah, waxaana kala sheekeynaynaa arimaha nidaamka oo aan u soo dhiibnay qiimeynta.", 'sr': 'Veliki repozitori naučne literature pozivaju na razvoj robnih metoda da izvuče informacije iz naučnih papira. Ovaj problem je rešio zadatak 7 za pola Evala 2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji odnosa pronađenih u naučnim publikacijama. U ovom papiru predstavljamo na osnovu karakteristike i dubok pristup na osnovu učenja zadatku i razgovaramo o rezultatima sistema koji smo predali za procjenu.', 'ur': 'دانشمندی ادبیات کی بڑی رپوسٹریس کے لئے مضبوط طریقوں کی توسعہ کی دعا کرتی ہے کہ علمی کاغذوں سے معلومات نکالیں۔ اس مسئلہ کو نصف ایول 2018 ٹاکس ۷ کے ذریعہ سمیٹ دیا گیا ہے جو علمی جماعت میں پائی گئی رابطہ نکالنے اور کلاسفی کرنے کے بارے میں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک شخصیت پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں اور ایک عمیق تعلیم پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں اور اس سیستم کے نتیجے میں مشورہ کرتے ہیں جنہیں ہم نے ارزیابی کے لئے پیش کیا ہے.', 'ta': 'அறிவியல் எழுத்துரு பெரிய கிடங்குகள் கல்வியான தாள்களிலிருந்து தகவலை பெறுவதற்கு ரோப்ட் முறைகளை உருவாக்க அழைக்கிறது. இந்த பிரச்சினை செம்Eval 2018 பணி 7 முகவரிக்கப்படுகிறது அறிவியல் பொருளில் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்புகளை வெளியேற்றி வகைப In this paper, we present a feature-based and a deep learning-based approach to the task and discuss the results of the system runs that we submitted for evaluation.', 'uz': "Ilmiy litteratordagi katta repositori taʼlumotni o'rganish uchun robot metodlarini taʼminlashni talab qiladi. Name Bu hujjatda, biz vazifaning asosida o'rganish asosiy va juda qiziqarli o'rganish usuli hosil qilamiz va tizimning natijalarini qiymatga qoʻllanmagan natijalarini javob beramiz.", 'vi': 'Các kho lưu trữ khoa học lớn yêu cầu phát triển các phương pháp mạnh mẽ để lấy thông tin từ các báo khoa học. Vấn đề này được giải quyết bởi Nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác và phân loại các mối quan hệ trong các tạp chí khoa học. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp dựa trên đặc điểm và một cách thức học sâu về công việc và thảo luận về kết quả của các hoạt động hệ thống mà chúng tôi đã đưa ra để đánh giá.', 'bg': 'Големите хранилища на научната литература изискват разработването на стабилни методи за извличане на информация от научни статии. Този проблем е разгледан от Задача 7 за извличане и класифициране на отношенията, открити в научните публикации. В настоящата статия представяме функционален и задълбочен подход към задачата и обсъждаме резултатите от системните работи, които представихме за оценка.', 'hr': 'Veliki skladište znanstvenih književnosti pozivaju na razvoj robnih metoda za izvlačenje informacija iz učenjskih papira. Ovaj problem je riješio zadatak 7 za pola Evala 2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji odnosa pronađenih unutar znanstvenih publikacija. U ovom papiru predstavljamo na temelju karakteristike i duboki pristup na temelju učenja zadatku i razgovaramo o rezultatima sustava koji smo predali za procjenu.', 'nl': 'Grote repositories van wetenschappelijke literatuur vragen om de ontwikkeling van robuuste methoden om informatie uit wetenschappelijke artikelen te halen. Dit probleem wordt aangepakt door de SemEval 2018 Task 7 over het extraheren en classificeren van relaties in wetenschappelijke publicaties. In dit artikel presenteren we een feature-based en een deep learning-based benadering van de taak en bespreken we de resultaten van de systeemruns die we voor evaluatie hebben ingediend.', 'da': 'Store arkiver af videnskabelig litteratur kræver udvikling af robuste metoder til at udtrække information fra videnskabelige artikler. Dette problem løses af SemEval 2018 Task 7 om udvinding og klassificering af relationer fundet i videnskabelige publikationer. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en funktionsbaseret og dyb læringsbaseret tilgang til opgaven og diskuterer resultaterne af de systemkørsler, som vi indsendte til evaluering.', 'de': 'Große Repositorien wissenschaftlicher Literatur erfordern die Entwicklung robuster Methoden, um Informationen aus wissenschaftlichen Arbeiten zu extrahieren. Diesem Problem widmet sich die SemEval 2018 Task 7 zur Extraktion und Klassifizierung von Zusammenhängen in wissenschaftlichen Publikationen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen funktionsbasierten und einen Deep Learning-basierten Ansatz für die Aufgabe vor und diskutieren die Ergebnisse der Systemläufe, die wir zur Evaluation eingereicht haben.', 'id': 'Repositori besar dari literatur ilmiah meminta pengembangan metode yang kuat untuk mengekstrak informasi dari kertas ilmiah. Masalah ini diselesaikan oleh SemEval 2018 Task 7 tentang ekstraksi dan klasifikasi hubungan yang ditemukan dalam publikasi ilmiah. In this paper, we present a feature-based and a deep learning-based approach to the task and discuss the results of the system runs that we submitted for evaluation.', 'fa': 'ذخیره\u200cهای بزرگ از ادبیات علمی برای توسعه روش\u200cهای قوی برای اخراج اطلاعات از کاغذهای دانشمند می\u200cخواند. این مشکل توسط ماموریت ۷ نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ در مورد استخراج و کلاس کردن رابطه\u200cها در منتشر علمی پیدا شده است. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش بر اساس ویژه و روش عمیق یادگیری به کار نشان می دهیم و در مورد نتایج سیستم که برای ارزیابی ارزیابی فرستادیم بحث می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Makala makubwa ya fasihi ya kisayansi yanatoa wito wa maendeleo ya njia za kibaguzi ili kupata taarifa kutoka kwenye karatasi za kisayansi. Tatizo hili linahusishwa na kazi ya SemEval 2018 kwa ajili ya kuondoa na kusambaza mahusiano yaliyopatikana ndani ya magazeti ya kisayansi. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu yenye msingi na yenye msingi wa kujifunza kwa kazi hiyo na kujadili matokeo ya mfumo unaoendelea kwa ajili ya uchunguzi.', 'tr': 'Bilim edebi첵atyny흫 uly ga첵talary bilim makamlardan maglumatlary a챌mak 체챌in 첵igren챌 y철nlerni흫 geli힊megi gerek. Bu mesele Bilim publikalarynda tapyl첵an we klasifikasynda SemEval 2018 G철revi 7 tarapyndan 챌철zil첵채r. Bu kagyzda 챌yky힊 we 챌yky힊 철wrenmek 체챌in esasy tabanly bir meto첵y g철rkezip we 챌yky힊 etm채ge g철rkezil첵채n sistemi흫 netijesini 챌yk첵arys.', 'af': "Groot stoorplekke van wetenskaplike leeteratur roep vir die ontwikkeling van kragtige metodes om inligting uit die wetenskappe uit te trek. Hierdie probleem is deur die SemEval 2018 taak 7 aangespreek om verwantings te uitpak en klassifiseer binne wetenskaplike publikasies te vind. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n funksie-gebaseerde en 'n diep leer-gebaseerde toegang tot die taak en bespreek die resultate van die stelsel loop wat ons voorgestuur het vir evaluering.", 'am': 'የሳይንቀሳዊ ቋንቋ አካባቢዎች ከትምህርት ገጾች መረጃዎችን ለማውጣት የሮቦት ሥርዓቶችን ለማድረግ ይጠይቃሉ፡፡ ይህ ጉዳይ በሳይንቀሳዊ ፕሬጀክቶች ውስጥ የተገኘውን ግንኙነት በማውጣት እና ለመለየት ሲሆን በSemEval 2018 ስራ 7 የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለስራቱ የተመሳሳይ እና የጥልቅ ትምህርት መግለጫ እናስቀራለን እና የስርዓቱን ፍጻሜ ለማስተምር የደነገግነውን እናነጋግራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Գիտական գրականության մեծ պահեստները պահանջում են ուժեղ մեթոդներ զարգացնել գիտական թղթերից տեղեկատվություն ստանալու համար: Այս խնդիրը լուծվում է 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ"-ի 7-րդ հանձնարարության կողմից գիտական հրատարակություններում գտնվող հարաբերությունների վերացման և դասակարգման մասին: In this paper, we present a feature-based and a deep learning-based approach to the task and discuss the results of the system runs that we submitted for evaluation.', 'sq': 'Repozitorët e mëdha të letërsisë shkencore kërkojnë zhvillimin e metodave të forta për të nxjerrë informacionin nga letrat shkencore. Ky problem është trajtuar nga SemEval 2018 Task 7 mbi nxjerrjen dhe klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve të gjetura brenda publikimeve shkencore. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një qasje bazuar në karakteristika dhe një qasje bazuar në mësim të thellë ndaj detyrës dhe diskutojmë rezultatet e sistemit që paraqitëm për vlerësim.', 'az': 'Bilimsel səhifələrin böyük depositələri bilgi kağıtlarından məlumatları çıxartmaq üçün qüvvətli metodların gelişməsinə çağırır. Bu problemi bilimsel yayınlamalarda bulunan əlaqələri çıxartmaq və klasifikasiya barəsində 2018-ci SemEval Task 7 tərəfindən çəkilir. Bu kağızda, təhsil-təhsil-təhsil-təhsil-təhsil-təhsil və dərin öyrənmə-təhsil-təhsil işinə göstərdik və sistemin sonuçlarını mübahisə edirik.', 'bs': 'Veliki repozitori naučne literature pozivaju na razvoj robnih metoda da izvuče informacije iz naučnih papira. Ovaj problem je riješio zadatak 7 za pola Evala 2018 o izvlačenju i klasifikaciji odnosa pronađenih u naučnim publikacijama. U ovom papiru predstavljamo na temelju karakteristike i duboki pristup na temelju učenja zadatku i razgovaramo o rezultatima sustava koji smo predali za procjenu.', 'ca': "Els grans repositoris de la literatura científica demanen el desenvolupament de mètodes robustos per extrair informació dels estudis. Aquest problema està abordat per la 7ª tasca SemEval 2018 sobre l'extracció i la classificació de les relacions trobadas en publicacions científices. En aquest paper, presentem un enfocament basat en característiques i en l'aprenentatge profund a la tasca i discutem els resultats del sistema que vam presentar per avaluació.", 'bn': 'বৈজ্ঞানিক সাহিত্যের বিশাল রিপোর্টিরিপোর্টি শিক্ষাগত কাগজ থেকে তথ্য পাওয়ার জন্য রোবস্ট পদ্ধতি উন্নয়নের আহ্ বৈজ্ঞানিক প্রকাশিত সম্পর্ক বের করে এবং বিশ্লেষণের মধ্যে পাওয়া যায় সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজের কাজ ৭ কর্মসূচি এই সমস্যার কথা বলেছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা কাজের কাছে একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য ভিত্তিক এবং গভীর শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক উপায় উপস্থাপন করি এবং সিস্টেমের ফলাফলের কথা আলোচনা করি যা', 'ko': '과학 문헌의 대형 저장소는 학술 논문에서 정보를 추출하는 믿을 만한 방법을 개발해야 한다.SemEval 2018 미션 7(과학 출판물 추출 및 분류에서의 관계)이 이 문제를 해결했다.본고에서 우리는 특징과 깊이 있는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 임무 방법을 제시했고 우리가 평가를 제출한 시스템 운영 결과를 토론했다.', 'cs': 'Velké repozitáře vědecké literatury vyžadují vývoj robustních metod pro získávání informací z odborných prací. Tento problém řeší SemEval 2018 Task 7 na extrahování a klasifikaci vztahů nalezených ve vědeckých publikacích. V tomto článku představujeme přístup založený na funkcích a hlubokém učení k úkolu a diskutujeme výsledky systémových běhů, které jsme předložili k vyhodnocení.', 'et': 'Suured teaduskirjanduse hoidlad nõuavad tugevate meetodite väljatöötamist teaduslikest artiklitest teabe väljavõtmiseks. Seda probleemi käsitletakse SemEval 2018. aasta ülesandes 7, mis käsitleb teadusväljaannetes leiduvate suhete kaevandamist ja liigitamist. Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame funktsioonipõhist ja sügavõppepõhist lähenemisviisi ülesandele ning arutame hindamiseks esitatud süsteemi jooksude tulemusi.', 'fi': 'Suuret tieteellisen kirjallisuuden arkistot vaativat kestävien menetelmien kehittämistä tiedon poimimiseksi tieteellisistä julkaisuista. Tätä ongelmaa käsitellään SemEval 2018 -tehtävässä 7 tieteellisissä julkaisuissa esiintyvien suhteiden erottamisesta ja luokittelusta. Tässä työssä esittelemme tehtävään ominaisuuspohjaisen ja syväoppimiseen perustuvan lähestymistavan ja keskustelemme arvioitavaksi toimittamiemme järjestelmäajojen tuloksista.', 'ha': "Bayan takardar littafan da aka sani suna kira a buɗe-up metoden raɗabi dõmin ya sami information daga takardar littafan da aka sani. Taimar wannan ana yi addu'a da aikin Semeval 2018 na samun fita da rarrabẽwa masu haɗi da aka sãmu a cikin takardar da masu sayansi. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wata matsayi wanda aka ƙayyade wa aikin da aka kai yanzu, kuma Munã yi jayayya da matsalan na'urar-na'urar da za'a gabatar da abin da muka ƙarfafa dõmin an evaluce.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk karo akeh basa saiki gedung nggawe ngubah sistem sing gak nggawe informasi ning apik dhéwé kuwi apik dhéwé. Wurung iki dadi saben ngupakan kelas seminval 2020 task 7 tentang nggampang lan kelas barang nggambar barang sampeyan didasahan ing pansula Sayensi. Nang paper iki, kita nambah kang dipunahayo sing basa-basa lan ijol-ijol kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang sistem sing bisa diandelah kanggo awak dhéwé ngerasaye cara nggawe tarjamahan.', 'he': 'מחסנים גדולים של ספרות מדעית דורשים לפיתוח שיטות חזקות כדי להוציא מידע ממסמכים מדעים. הבעיה הזאת מתמודדת על ידי משימה 7 של SemEval 2018 על החולץ והקלאסיפור מערכות יחסים נמצאות בתוך פרסומות מדעיים. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים גישה מבוססת על תכונות ומבוססת על למידה עמוקה למשימה ולדיון על תוצאות המערכת ששלחנו להערכה.', 'sk': 'Veliki repozitoriji znanstvene literature zahtevajo razvoj robustnih metod za pridobivanje informacij iz znanstvenih člankov. To težavo obravnava naloga 7 SemEval 2018 o ekstrakciji in razvrščanju odnosov v znanstvenih publikacijah. V prispevku predstavljamo funkcijski in globoko učenje temelječ pristop k nalogi ter razpravljamo o rezultatih sistemskih zagonov, ki smo jih predložili v oceno.', 'bo': 'ཚན་རིག་གི་མཛུབ་ཁང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་དག་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོང་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ནི་རེ་བ་ལོངས་༢༠༠་ཅན་གྱི་དཔོན་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཕྱིར་བསྒྲགས་དང་སྒྲིག་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In this paper, we present a feature-based and a deep learning-based approach to the task and discuss the results of the system runs that we submitted for evaluation.'}
{'en': 'ClaiRE at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Classification of Relations using Embeddings', 'fr': "ClAIre à SemEval-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Classification des relations à l'aide des intégrations", 'ar': 'ClaiRE في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: تصنيف العلاقات باستخدام حفلات الزفاف', 'es': 'CLaire en SemEval-2018 Tarea 7: Clasificación de relaciones mediante incrustaciones', 'pt': 'ClaiRE no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Classificação de Relações usando Embeddings', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のClaiREタスク7 ：埋め込みを使用した関係の分類', 'zh': 'ClaiRE at SemEval-2018 务 7:嵌分', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 पर ClaiRE: एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके संबंधों का वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'ClaiRE на SemEval-2018 Задача 7: Классификация отношений с использованием вложений', 'ga': 'ClaiRE ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Aicmiú Caidrimh ag Úsáid Leabaithe', 'hu': 'Claire a SemEval-2018 7. feladat: Kapcsolatok osztályozása beágyazásokkal', 'ka': 'ClaiRE semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 7: კლასიფიკაცია პრობლემების გამოყენება', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Ταξινόμηση των σχέσεων με τη χρήση ενσωμάτωσης', 'kk': 'ClaiRE 7. тапсырмасы: Ендірілген қатынастар классификациясы', 'it': 'Claire al SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classificazione delle relazioni utilizzando Embedding', 'lt': 'ClaiRE per 2018 m. pusmetį 7 užduotis: ryšių klasifikavimas naudojant įrangą', 'mk': 'ClaiRE на SemEval-2018 задача 7: Класификација на односите користејќи внатрешни објекти', 'mt': 'ClaiRE f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7: Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet bl-użu ta’ Embeddings', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7- ലെ ക്ലായിരി: എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d', 'ms': 'ClaiRE at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification of Relations using Embeddings', 'no': 'ClaiRE ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 7: Klassifikasjon av relasjonar ved bruk av innbygging', 'ro': 'Claire la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 7: Clasificarea relațiilor utilizând încorporări', 'pl': 'ClaiRE na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 7: Klasyfikacja relacji przy użyciu osadzeń', 'mn': 'ClaiRE at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification of Relations using Embeddings', 'sr': 'ClaiRE na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: Klasifikacija odnosa korištenja integracija', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2018 7: Kalajarida xiriirka isticmaalka safarka', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 7: Embedding பயன்படுத்தி தொடர்புகள் வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 7 میں کلائر: ایمبڈینگ کے استعمال سے رابطہ کا کلاسیفٹ کرنا', 'sv': 'Claire på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Klassificering av relationer med hjälp av inbäddningar', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ phân loại các mối quan hệ sử dụng các nhúng', 'nl': 'ClaiRE op SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Classificatie van relaties met behulp van embeddings', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Класификация на отношенията чрез вграждания', 'hr': 'ClaiRE na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: klasifikacija odnosa koristeći uključenje', 'da': 'Claire ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Klassificering af relationer ved hjælp af indlejringer', 'de': 'ClaiRE bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 7: Klassifizierung von Beziehungen mittels Embeddings', 'ko': 'ClaiRE가 SemEval-18 작업 7: 포함된 관계식을 사용하여 분류', 'fa': 'ClaiRE at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification of Relations using Embeddings', 'id': 'ClaiRE di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Klasifikasi Hubungan menggunakan Embeddings', 'sw': 'ClaiRE katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 7: Kutangaza uhusiano kwa kutumia Mambo ya Nchini', 'af': 'ClaiRE by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 7: Klassifikasie van Relasies met gebruik van Inbettings', 'tr': 'ClaiRE at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification of Relations using Embeddings', 'sq': 'ClaiRE në SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification of Relations using Embeddings', 'am': 'ስራ 7: Classification of Relations using Embedding', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Görevi 7: İlişkilərin Klasifikasyonu', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৭-এ ক্লায়েরি: Embedding ব্যবহার করে সম্পর্কের স্লাসিফেশন', 'ca': 'ClaiRE a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification of Relations using Embeddings', 'cs': 'ClaiRE na SemEval-2018 Úkol 7: Klasifikace vztahů pomocí vložení', 'et': 'Claire at SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 7: Suhete klassifitseerimine manustamise abil', 'bs': 'ClaiRE na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: klasifikacija odnosa koristeći uključenje', 'fi': 'Claire SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Suhteiden luokittelu upotusten avulla', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Claire na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Razvrstitev odnosov z uporabo vdelav', 'bo': 'ClaiRE at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification of Relations using Embeddings', 'he': 'ClaiRE ב SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classification of Relations using Embeddings'}
{'en': 'In this paper we describe our system for SemEval-2018 Task 7 on classification of semantic relations in scientific literature for clean (subtask 1.1) and noisy data (subtask 1.2). We compare two models for classification, a C-LSTM which utilizes only word embeddings and an SVM that also takes handcrafted features into account. To adapt to the domain of science we train word embeddings on scientific papers collected from arXiv.org. The hand-crafted features consist of lexical features to model the semantic relations as well as the entities between which the relation holds. Classification of Relations using Embeddings (ClaiRE) achieved an F1 score of 74.89 % for the first subtask and 78.39 % for the second.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف نظامنا لـ SemEval-2018 Task 7 حول تصنيف العلاقات الدلالية في الأدبيات العلمية للنظافة (المهمة الفرعية 1.1) والبيانات الصاخبة (المهمة الفرعية 1.2). نحن نقارن بين نموذجين للتصنيف ، C-LSTM الذي يستخدم فقط زخرفة الكلمات و SVM الذي يأخذ أيضًا في الاعتبار الميزات المصنوعة يدويًا. للتكيف مع مجال العلوم ، نقوم بتدريب زخارف الكلمات على الأوراق العلمية التي تم جمعها من arXiv.org. تتكون الميزات المصنوعة يدويًا من ميزات معجمية لنمذجة العلاقات الدلالية وكذلك الكيانات التي تربطها العلاقة. حقق تصنيف العلاقات باستخدام التضمين (ClaiRE) درجة F1 بلغت 74.89٪ للمهمة الفرعية الأولى و 78.39٪ للثانية.', 'es': 'En este artículo describimos nuestro sistema para la Tarea 7 de SemEval-2018 sobre clasificación de las relaciones semánticas en la literatura científica para datos limpios (subtarea 1.1) y ruidosos (subtarea 1.2). Comparamos dos modelos para la clasificación, un C-LSTM que utiliza solo incrustaciones de palabras y un SVM que también tiene en cuenta las características artesanales. Para adaptarnos al dominio de la ciencia, entrenamos la incorporación de palabras en artículos científicos recopilados de Arxiv.org. Las características hechas a mano consisten en características léxicas para modelar las relaciones semánticas, así como las entidades entre las que se mantiene la relación. Classification of Relations using Embeddings (CLaire) logró una puntuación F1 del 74,89% para la primera subtarea y del 78,39% para la segunda.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons notre système pour SEMEval-2018 Task 7 sur la classification des relations sémantiques dans la littérature scientifique pour les données propres (sous-tâche 1.1) et bruitées (sous-tâche 1.2). Nous comparons deux modèles pour la classification, un C-LSTM qui utilise uniquement des intégrations de mots et un SVM qui prend également en compte les caractéristiques artisanales. Pour nous adapter au domaine de la science, nous formons l'intégration de mots sur des articles scientifiques collectés sur ARXIV.org. Les caractéristiques fabriquées à la main consistent en des caractéristiques lexicales pour modéliser les relations sémantiques ainsi que les entités entre lesquelles la relation est maintenue. Classification of Relations using Embeddings (ClAIre) a obtenu un score F1 de 74,89\xa0% pour la première sous-tâche et de 78,39\xa0% pour la seconde.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo descrevemos nosso sistema para a Tarefa 7 do SemEval-2018 sobre classificação de relações semânticas na literatura científica para dados limpos (subtarefa 1.1) e ruidosos (subtarefa 1.2). Comparamos dois modelos de classificação, um C-LSTM que utiliza apenas word embeddings e um SVM que também leva em consideração recursos artesanais. Para se adaptar ao domínio da ciência, treinamos incorporações de palavras em artigos científicos coletados do arXiv.org. Os recursos artesanais consistem em recursos lexicais para modelar as relações semânticas, bem como as entidades entre as quais a relação se mantém. A Classificação de Relações usando Embeddings (ClaiRE) obteve uma pontuação F1 de 74,89% para a primeira subtarefa e 78,39% para a segunda.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम स्वच्छ (subtask 1.1) और शोर डेटा (subtask 1.2) के लिए वैज्ञानिक साहित्य में शब्दार्थ संबंधों के वर्गीकरण पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 के लिए हमारी प्रणाली का वर्णन करते हैं। हम वर्गीकरण के लिए दो मॉडलों की तुलना करते हैं, एक सी-एलएसटीएम जो केवल शब्द एम्बेडिंग और एक एसवीएम का उपयोग करता है जो हस्तनिर्मित सुविधाओं को भी ध्यान में रखता है। विज्ञान के डोमेन के अनुकूल होने के लिए हम arXiv.org से एकत्र किए गए वैज्ञानिक कागजात पर शब्द एम्बेडिंग को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। हाथ से तैयार की गई विशेषताओं में शब्दार्थ संबंधों के साथ-साथ उन संस्थाओं को मॉडल करने के लिए लेक्सिकल विशेषताएं शामिल हैं जिनके बीच संबंध है। एम्बेडिंग (ClaiRE) का उपयोग करके संबंधों का वर्गीकरण पहले उपकार्य के लिए 74.89% और दूसरे के लिए 78.39% का F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किया।', 'ja': '本稿では、クリーン（サブタスク1.1 ）およびノイズの多いデータ（サブタスク1.2 ）のための科学文献における意味関係の分類に関するSemEval -2018タスク7のためのシステムについて説明する。私たちは、単語埋め込みのみを利用するC - LSTMと、手作業で作成された機能も考慮したSVMの2つの分類モデルを比較します。科学の領域に適応するために、私たちはarXiv.orgから収集された科学論文に単語埋め込みをトレーニングします。手作りの特徴は、意味関係をモデル化するための辞書的特徴と、関係が保持されるエンティティから構成されています。埋め込みを用いた関係の分類（ ClaiRE ）は、最初のサブタスクでは74.89%、2番目のサブタスクでは78.39%のF 1スコアを達成した。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2018务7之统,7及科学文语义之分,所以洁(子1.1)、噪声数(子1.2)。 吾校二形,一则销C-LSTM,一则SVM,虑工之功也。 应科学域, arXiv.org 科学论文训练词嵌。 工词汇成,所以建模语义也。 用嵌(ClaiRE)分类,首子F1分为74.89%,次子为78.39%。', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы описываем нашу систему для задачи 7 SemEval-2018 по классификации семантических отношений в научной литературе для чистых (подзадача 1.1) и шумных данных (подзадача 1.2). Для классификации мы сравниваем две модели: C-LSTM, который использует только вставки слов, и виртуальную машину защиты, которая также учитывает функции ручной работы. Чтобы адаптироваться к области науки, мы обучаем внедрению слов на научных работах, собранных с arXiv.org. Особенности ручной работы состоят из лексических особенностей для моделирования семантических отношений, а также сущностей, между которыми эти отношения находятся. Классификация отношений с использованием вложений (ClaiRE) достигла F1 балла 74,89% для первой подзадачи и 78,39% для второй.', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid cur síos ar ár gcóras le haghaidh Tasc 7 SemEval-2018 ar aicmiú caidreamh séimeantach sa litríocht eolaíoch le haghaidh sonraí glan (fothasc 1.1) agus torannacha (fothasc 1.2). Déanaimid comparáid idir dhá mhúnla le haghaidh aicmithe, C-LSTM nach n-úsáideann ach leabaithe focal agus SVM a chuireann gnéithe lámhdhéanta san áireamh freisin. Chun oiriúnú d'fhearann na heolaíochta cuirimid oiliúint ar neadú focal ar pháipéir eolaíocha a bhailítear ó arXiv.org. Is éard atá sna gnéithe lámhdhéanta gnéithe foclóireachta chun an caidreamh séimeantach a shamhaltú chomh maith leis na heintitis a bhfuil an gaol eatarthu. Ghnóthaigh Rangú Caidrimh ag úsáid Leabaithe (ClaiRE) scór F1 de 74.89% don chéad fhothasc agus 78.39% don dara fothasc.", 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემა SemEval-2018 დავალებისთვის 7-ის კლასიფიკაციაში სმენტიკური პირობების კლასიფიკაციაზე მეცნიერო ლიტებერიოში წაშლად (1.1 წაშლად) და ძალიან მონაცემების ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციისთვის ორი მოდელის შემდგენებთ, C-LSTM, რომელიც მხოლოდ სიტყვების შემდგენება და SVM, რომელიც კლასიფიკაციისთვის შემდგენება. ჱა ეა ჟვ აეაორთპამვ ნა ეჲმთნარა ნა ნასფთნარა, ნთვ რპვნთპამვ ესმარა ჱა თნბვეთნდთპაŒვ ნა ნასფნთრვ ეჲკსმვრთ, კჲთრჲ ჟვ ჟკლძფთჳა ჲრ ა org. პანელი შექმნილი ფუნქციები არის ლექსიკალური ფუნქციებისგან, რომელიც სემენტიკური პრობლემების მოდელისთვის, და ინტერციები, რომელიც პრობლემების შორის გა კლასიფიკაცია შესაბამისი შესაბამისი გამოყენება (ClaiRE) F1 წერტილის 74,89% წერტილის პირველი საბეჭირო და 78,39% მეორე წერტილისთვის.', 'it': "In questo articolo descriviamo il nostro sistema per SemEval-2018 Task 7 sulla classificazione delle relazioni semantiche nella letteratura scientifica per dati puliti (sottomissione 1.1) e rumorosi (sottomissione 1.2). Confrontiamo due modelli per la classificazione, un C-LSTM che utilizza solo incorporazioni di parole e un SVM che tiene conto anche delle caratteristiche artigianali. Per adattarsi al dominio della scienza addestriamo l'incorporazione di parole su articoli scientifici raccolti da arXiv. org. Le caratteristiche artigianali sono costituite da caratteristiche lessicali per modellare le relazioni semantiche e le entità tra le quali si instaura la relazione. La classificazione delle relazioni utilizzando Embeddings (ClaiRE) ha ottenuto un punteggio F1 del 74,89% per la prima sottomissione e del 78,39% per la seconda.", 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban ismertetjük a SemEval-2018 Task 7 szemantikai kapcsolatok osztályozásáról a tudományos irodalomban tiszta (1.1) és zajos adatok (1.2) esetében. Két osztályozási modellt hasonlítunk össze: egy C-LSTM, amely csak szóbeágyazásokat használ, és egy SVM, amely szintén figyelembe veszi a kézműves funkciókat. A tudomány területéhez való alkalmazkodás érdekében szóbeágyazásokat képzünk az arXiv-től gyűjtött tudományos cikkekre. org. A kézzel készített jellemzők lexikai jellemzőkből állnak, amelyek modellezik a szemantikai kapcsolatokat, valamint azokat az entitásokat, amelyek között a kapcsolat tartozik. A kapcsolatok beágyazásokkal történő osztályozása (ClaiRE) az első résztevékenység esetében 74,89%-os F1 pontszámot ért el, a második pedig 78,39%-os volt.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία περιγράφουμε το σύστημά μας για την εργασία 7 για την ταξινόμηση σημασιολογικών σχέσεων στην επιστημονική βιβλιογραφία για καθαρά (δευτερεύουσα εργασία 1.1) και θορυβώδη δεδομένα (δευτερεύουσα εργασία 1.2). Συγκρίνουμε δύο μοντέλα για ταξινόμηση, ένα που χρησιμοποιεί μόνο ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και ένα που λαμβάνει επίσης υπόψη τα χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά. Για να προσαρμοστούμε στον τομέα της επιστήμης εκπαιδεύουμε την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων σε επιστημονικές εργασίες που συλλέγονται από το arXiv. org. Τα χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά αποτελούνται από λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά για να μοντελοποιήσουν τις σημασιολογικές σχέσεις καθώς και τις οντότητες μεταξύ των οποίων η σχέση υφίσταται. Η ταξινόμηση των σχέσεων με τη χρήση ενσωμάτωσης (ClaiRE) πέτυχε βαθμολογία F1 74,89% για την πρώτη δευτερεύουσα εργασία και 78,39% για τη δεύτερη.', 'kk': "Бұл қағазда біз 7- жарым-2018 тапсырмасының жүйесімізді таңдаймыз (1.1- сурет) және дыбыс деректерді (1.2- сурет) земантикалық қатынастарының классификациялауын (1.2- сурет) және бізд Біз классификациялау үшін екі үлгі салыстырамыз, C- LSTM, ол тек сөздерді ендіру және қолмен құрылған мүмкіндіктерді есептеу үшін қолданатын SVM үлгілерін қолдануға бол Ғылымның доменіне адаптау үшін, арXiv-ден жинақталған ғылыми қағаздарда сөздерді ендіру үшін үйренеміз. org. You are about to translate the 'GoX' COMMAND, there are some rules on how to translate it. Please see http: // edu. kde. org/ kturtle/ translator. php to learn how to properly translate it. Қол құрылған мүмкіндіктері, сілтеменің арасындағы қатынастарды, семантикалық қатынастарды үлгілеу үшін лексикалық мүмкіндіктерінен тұрады. Ендіру (ClaiRE) қолданылатын қатынастар классификациясы бірінші субсұрау үшін 74, 89% және екінші субсұрау үшін 78, 39% жұмыс жеткізді.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 7 വിവരിക്കുന്നു. ശാസ്ത്രീയ സാഹിത്യത്തിലെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200dറെ രണ്ട് മോഡലുകള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു C-LSTM, അത് വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നുള്ളൂ എന്നിട്ട് ഒരു SV ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഡോമെയിനിലേക്ക് മാറ്റാന്\u200d ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ശേഖരിച്ച വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിശീലി org.  സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധങ്ങളും തമ്മിലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളും മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷങ്ങളുടെ കൈകാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d 74. 89% ആദ്യത്തെ സബ്ബിസ്റ്റിനും 78. 39% സെക്കന്റിനും എഫ്', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan sistem kami untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 7 mengenai klasifikasi hubungan semantik dalam literatur saintifik untuk bersih (subtask 1.1) dan data bunyi (subtask 1.2). Kami membandingkan dua model untuk klasifikasi, C-LSTM yang hanya menggunakan penyembedding perkataan dan SVM yang juga mengambil kiraan ciri-ciri buatan tangan. Untuk menyesuaikan diri dengan bidang sains kita melatih pembangunan perkataan pada kertas sains yang dikumpulkan dari arXiv. org. Ciri-ciri buatan-tangan terdiri daripada ciri-ciri leksikal untuk model hubungan semantik serta entiti di antara yang hubungan memegang. Klasifikasi Hubungan menggunakan Embeddings (ClaiRE) mencapai skor F1 74.89% untuk subtask pertama dan 78.39% untuk kedua.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument niddeskrivu s-sistema tagħna għas-SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7 dwar il-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet semantiċi fil-letteratura xjentifika għal dejta nadifa (sottomistoqsija 1.1) u storbjuża (sottomistoqsija 1.2). Aħna nqabblu żewġ mudelli għall-klassifikazzjoni, C-LSTM li juża biss l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem u SVM li jqis ukoll il-karatteristiċi tal-manjiera. Biex nadattaw għall-qasam tax-xjenza aħna nħarrġu l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem fuq dokumenti xjentifiċi miġbura mill-arXiv. org. The hand-crafted features consist of lexical features to model the semantic relations as well as the entities between which the relation holds.  Il-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet bl-użu tal-Embeddings (ClaiRE) kisbet punteġġ F1 ta’ 74.89% għall-ewwel sottotalba u 78.39% għat-tieni.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2018 Task 7-ийн системийг шинжлэх ухааны уран зохиолын semantic relations classified for clean (subtask 1.1) болон чимээгүй мэдээллийг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид хуваалцааны хоёр загварыг харьцуулдаг. C-LSTM нь зөвхөн үгний нэвтрүүлэлтийг ашигладаг. Мөн гар бүтээгдэхүүнийг ашигладаг. Шинжлэх ухааны хувьд зөвхөн арXiv-ээс цуглуулагдсан шинжлэх ухааны сонинууд дээр үг бичлэгүүдийг суралцах хэрэгтэй. org. Гараа бүтээгдэхүүн нь семантийн харилцаа, харилцааны хоорондоо байгаа бүтээлүүдийг загварчлахын тулд лексикийн харилцаа юм. Холбоонуудыг ашиглаж буй харилцааны классификаци (ClaiRE) нь анхны суурь асуултын хувьд 74,89% болон хоёр дахь хувьд 78,39%.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi systemet vårt for semiEval-2018 oppgåve 7 om klassifisering av semantiske forhold i vitenskapelige literatur for rein (subtspør 1.1) og støydata (subtspør 1.2). Vi sammenliknar to modeller for klassifikasjon, ein C- LSTM som berre brukar ordinnbygging og ein SVM som også brukar handhaldne funksjonar i konto. For å tilpassa domenet av vitenskap treng vi ordinnbygging på vitenskapelige papir samla frå arXiv. org. Handskrafte funksjonane inneheld av leksiske funksjonar for å modellere semantiske forhold og entitetene mellom dei forhold. Klassifikasjon av relasjonar ved bruk av innbygging (ClaiRE) fikk eit F1- poeng med 74,89% for den første underspørjinga og 78,39% for den andre.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama mūsų sistema SemEval-2018 7 užduotis dėl semantinių santykių klasifikavimo mokslinėje literatūroje švarių (1.1 papunktis) ir triukšmingų duomenų (1.2 papunktis). Palyginame du klasifikavimo modelius: C-LSTM, kuris naudoja tik žodžių įdėjimus, ir SVM, kuriame taip pat atsižvelgiama į rankines savybes. Kad prisitaikytume prie mokslo srities mes mokome žodžių įtraukimą į mokslinius dokumentus, surinktus iš arXiv. org.  The hand-crafted features consist of lexical features to model the semantic relations as well as the entities between which the relation holds.  Ryšių klasifikavimas naudojant įdėtas medžiagas (ClaiRE) pasiekė 74,89 % pirmojo paklausos ir 78,39 % antrojo paklausos F1.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano nasz system dla SemEval-2018 Task 7 dotyczący klasyfikacji relacji semantycznych w literaturze naukowej dla danych czystych (podzadanie 1.1) i szumownych (podzadanie 1.2). Porównujemy dwa modele klasyfikacji: C-LSTM, który wykorzystuje tylko osadzenia słów i SVM, który uwzględnia również ręcznie wykonane funkcje. Aby dostosować się do dziedziny nauki, szkolimy osadzenia słów na pracach naukowych zebranych z arXiv. organizacja. Ręcznie tworzone cechy składają się z cech leksykalnych do modelowania relacji semantycznych, jak również podmiotów, między którymi relacja trwa. Klasyfikacja relacji przy użyciu osadzeń (ClaiRE) osiągnęła wynik F1 74,89% dla pierwszego podzadania i 78,39% dla drugiego.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го опишуваме нашиот систем за SemEval-2018 задача 7 за класификација на семантичките односи во научната литература за чисти (подпрашање 1.1) и гласни податоци (подпрашање 1.2). Ние споредуваме два модели за класификација, Ц-ЛСТМ кој користи само зборови вградени и СВМ кој исто така ги зема во предвид и рачните карактеристики. За да се прилагодиме на областа на науката, тренираме зборови на научни документи собрани од arXiv. org. Ручните карактеристики се состојат од лексички карактеристики за моделирање на семантичните односи, како и ентитетите меѓу кои се држи односот. Класификацијата на врските со користење на внатрешни објекти (ClaiRE) постигна оценка Ф1 од 74,89 отсто за првата подпрашање и 78,39 отсто за втората.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare descriem sistemul nostru pentru Sarcina 7 SemEval-2018 privind clasificarea relațiilor semantice în literatura științifică pentru date curate (subsarcina 1.1) și zgomotoase (subsarcina 1.2). Comparăm două modele pentru clasificare, un C-LSTM care utilizează numai încorporări de cuvinte și un SVM care ia în considerare și caracteristicile artizanale. Pentru a ne adapta la domeniul științei, instruim încorporări de cuvinte pe lucrări științifice colectate de la arXiv. org. Trăsăturile lucrate manual constau în trăsături lexicale pentru a modela relațiile semantice, precum și entitățile între care se află relația. Clasificarea Relațiilor folosind Embeddings (ClaiRE) a obținut un scor F1 de 74,89% pentru prima subactivitate și 78,39% pentru a doua.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි සෙම්වෙල්-2018 කාර්ය 7 ගැන අපේ පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරන්නේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාත්මක සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා විශේෂ සා අපි විශේෂණය සඳහා මොඩේල් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, C-LSTM එකක් විතරයි වචනය සහ SVM එකක් විතරයි, ඒ වගේම handcraftd අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් ග විද්\u200dයාන්ත විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න අපි විද්\u200dයාන්ත විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් ආර්ක්සිව් වලින් සංගේ org. සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවය සහ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවය සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවය අතර ඉන්න ලෙක්සිකාලික අවශ්\u200dය වලින ඇම්බෙඩින්ග් භාවිතා සම්බන්ධතාව (ClaiRE) භාවිත කරන සම්බන්ධතාවේ ක්ලාසිෆික්ෂිකරණය පළමුවෙනි සම්බන්ධතාව සඳහා පළම', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naš sistem za zadatak 7 za semiEval-2018 o klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa u naučnoj literaturi za čiste (podpitanje 1.1) i bučne podatke (podpitanje 1.2). Uspoređujemo dva modela za klasifikaciju, C-LSTM koja koristi samo rečenice i SVM koji takođe uzima u obzir i rukopisane funkcije. Da se prilagodimo domenu nauke, treniramo integraciju reči na naučnim papirima skupljenim iz arXiva. org. Ručne funkcije sastoje od leksičkih karakteristika za model semantičkih odnosa, kao i entitata između kojih se odnos drži. Klasifikacija odnosa koji koriste uključenje (ClaiRE) postigla je rezultat F1 od 74,89% za prvi podpitanje i 78,39% za drugi.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku qoraynaa nidaamka SemEval-2018 shaqo 7 oo ku saabsan fasaxa xiriirka sayniska cilmiga ah ee nadiifsan (subtask 1.1) iyo macluumaadka qaylyada (subtask 1.2). Waxaynu isbarbardhignaa laba tusaalood oo fasax u qoran, taasoo isticmaalaya hadal oo kaliya oo la soo bandhigayo iyo SVM oo sidoo kale ku xisaabinaya farsamada. si aan u dhigno deegaanka cilmiga waxaynu ku tababarinnaa hadal ku qoran warqadaha cilmiga ah ee laga soo ururiyey arxiv. org. Xirfaha gacanta lagu qabanayo waxay ka mid yihiin noocyo la xiriira isku xiriirka kala duduwan iyo waxyaabaha ay isku xiriir u leeyihiin. Kalajarida xiriirka lagu isticmaalayo qalabka (ClaiRE) waxay gaadhay koox F1 oo ah 74.89% subkadda ugu horeysa iyo 78.39% labaad.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi vårt system för SemEval-2018 Task 7 om klassificering av semantiska relationer i vetenskaplig litteratur för rena (subaktivitet 1.1) och bullriga data (subaktivitet 1.2). Vi jämför två modeller för klassificering, en C-LSTM som endast använder ordinbäddningar och en SVM som också tar hänsyn till handgjorda funktioner. För att anpassa sig till vetenskapsområdet tränar vi ordinbäddningar på vetenskapliga artiklar insamlade från arXiv. org. De handgjorda funktionerna består av lexikala funktioner för att modellera de semantiska relationerna samt de entiteter mellan vilka relationen håller. Klassificering av relationer med hjälp av inbäddningar (ClaiRE) uppnådde en F1-poäng på 74,89% för den första delaktiviteten och 78,39% för den andra.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் செம்வால்- 2018 பணியின் அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறோம் அறிவியல் விஞ்ஞானம் நிரலில் பாதிப்பு தொடர்புகளை வகைப்பில் 7 மற்றும் சுத்தம நாம் வகுப்பிற்கான இரண்டு மாதிரிகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம், ஒரு C-LSTM அது மட்டும் வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கம் மற்றும் ஒரு எஸ்விஎம் பயன்படுத்துகிறது,  அறிவியல் களத்திற்கு ஒப்பீடு செய்ய நாங்கள் அறிவியல் தாள்கள் சேகரிக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளை பயிற்சி செய்கிறோம். org. org கையில் கையாளும் குணங்கள் லெக்சிக்சியல் குணங்களில் உள்ளது பெம்மான்டிக் தொடர்புகளையும் இடையே உள்ள பொருள்களையும் மாதி பெட்டிங்கள் பயன்படுத்தி தொடர்புகளின் வகைப்படுத்தல் (ClaiRE) முதல் துணை பணிக்கு 74. 89% புள்ளியின் F1 புள்ளி', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں اپنے سیستم کو SemEval-2018 ٹاکس 7 کے لئے سفارشی (1.1) اور صوتی ڈیٹا (1.2) کے لئے سیمنٹی رابطہ کا کلاسپین کرتا ہے۔ ہم کلاسپیٹ کے لئے دو نمڈل مقایسہ کرتے ہیں، ایک C-LSTM جو صرف کلمات ابڈینگ اور ایک SVM کو استعمال کرتا ہے جو ہاندکریٹ ویٹیوں کو بھی حساب میں لیتا ہے۔ سائنس کے ڈومین کے ساتھ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے ہم ارکسیو سے جمع کئے ہوئے سائنس کاغذوں پر کلمات انبوڈینگ کی تعلیم دیتے ہیں. org. ہاتھ کے پیدا کئے ہوئے فرشتے لکسیکل فرشتوں میں سے ہیں جن کے درمیان رابطہ کا موڈل کرنا ہے اور جن کے درمیان رابطہ ہے۔ ایمبڈینگ (ClaiRE) کے استعمال سے رابطہ کا کلاسیفٹ 74.89% کی F1 سکوٹ پہلی زیب سوال کے لئے اور 78.39% دوسرے کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda SemEval-2018 Vazifaning 7 ta'siri bilan ilmiy littatidagi semantik aloqalarni tayyorlash (sub- vazifa 1. 1) va tovush maʼlumot (sub- vazifa 1. 2) haqida o'ylaymiz. Биз тарқатиш учун икки modelга муқаррар қиламиз, бу C-LSTM, фақат калима ўрнатиш ва SVM сифатларини ҳисоблаш учун фойдаланади. Ilmiy davrini o'rganish uchun biz ilmiy sahifan qoʻllangan so'zlarni arxiv tomonidan qo'llashga o'rganamiz. org. Name Ushbu qo'llab qo'llangan xususiyatlar, semantik aloqalarini modellashga va orasidagi bogʻ'liq maʼlumotiga ega. Name", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống của chúng tôi về nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 7 về việc phân loại các quan hệ theo ngữ pháp trong văn học về các loại sạch (subtle 1.1) và các dữ liệu ồn ào (subtask 1.2). Chúng tôi so sánh hai mẫu phân loại, một C-LSTM mà chỉ sử dụng từ nhúng trong và một SVM cũng có tính năng tự ráp. Để thích nghi với lĩnh vực khoa học chúng tôi đào tạo từ ngữ tham nhũng trên các giấy tờ khoa học được thu thập từ ArXi. Không. Các tính năng được làm thủ công gồm các tính năng ngôn ngữ để mô tả các quan hệ ngữ pháp cũng như các thực thể mà mối quan hệ đó nắm giữ. Việc phân hạng các quan hệ sử dụng nhúng tay (Claeire) đã đạt được một điểm F1 của 74.899=. for the first subtask and 78.39=. for the second.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi vores system til SemEval-2018 Task 7 om klassificering af semantiske relationer i videnskabelig litteratur for rene (subaktivitet 1.1) og støjende data (subaktivitet 1.2). Vi sammenligner to modeller til klassificering, en C-LSTM, der kun bruger ord indlejringer, og en SVM, der også tager håndlavede funktioner i betragtning. For at tilpasse sig videnskabsdomænet træner vi ordindlejringer på videnskabelige artikler indsamlet fra arXiv. org. De håndlavede træk består af leksikske træk til at modellere de semantiske relationer såvel som de entiteter, som relationen har. Klassificering af relationer ved hjælp af indlejringer (ClaiRE) opnåede en F1 score på 74,89% for den første underopgave og 78,39% for den anden.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we ons systeem voor SemEval-2018 Taak 7 over classificatie van semantische relaties in wetenschappelijke literatuur voor schone (subtaak 1.1) en noise data (subtaak 1.2). We vergelijken twee modellen voor classificatie, een C-LSTM die alleen woordinsluitingen gebruikt en een SVM die ook rekening houdt met handgemaakte functies. Om ons aan te passen aan het domein van de wetenschap trainen we woordembeddingen op wetenschappelijke artikelen verzameld uit arXiv. org. De handgemaakte kenmerken bestaan uit lexicale kenmerken om zowel de semantische relaties als de entiteiten tussen die relatie te modelleren. Classification of Relations using Embeddings (ClaiRE) behaalde een F1 score van 74,89% voor de eerste subtaak en 78,39% voor de tweede.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan sistem kami untuk SemEval-2018 Tugas 7 tentang klasifikasi hubungan semantis dalam literatur ilmiah untuk bersih (subtask 1.1) dan data berisik (subtask 1.2). Kami membandingkan dua model untuk klasifikasi, sebuah C-LSTM yang menggunakan hanya penyembedding kata dan SVM yang juga mempertimbangkan fitur buatan tangan. Untuk beradaptasi dengan bidang ilmu pengetahuan kita melatih pembangunan kata pada kertas ilmu pengetahuan yang dikumpulkan dari arXiv. org. Karakteristik yang dibuat tangan terdiri dari karakteristik lexik untuk model hubungan semantis serta entitas di antara mana hubungan memegang. Klasifikasi Hubungan menggunakan Embeddings (ClaiRE) mencapai skor F1 74,89% untuk subtask pertama dan 78,39% untuk kedua.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir unser System für SemEval-2018 Task 7 zur Klassifizierung semantischer Beziehungen in der wissenschaftlichen Literatur für saubere (Subtask 1.1) und noise Daten (Subtask 1.2). Wir vergleichen zwei Modelle zur Klassifizierung, ein C-LSTM, das nur Worteinbettungen verwendet, und ein SVM, das auch handgefertigte Funktionen berücksichtigt. Um sich an den Wissenschaftsbereich anzupassen, trainieren wir Worteinbettungen auf wissenschaftlichen Arbeiten, die von arXiv gesammelt wurden. org. Die handgefertigten Merkmale bestehen aus lexikalischen Merkmalen, um die semantischen Beziehungen sowie die Entitäten, zwischen denen die Beziehung besteht, zu modellieren. Die Klassifizierung von Beziehungen mit Einbettungen (ClaiRE) erzielte eine F1-Punktzahl von 74,89% für den ersten Teilauftrag und 78,39% für den zweiten.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naš sustav za zadatak 7 za semiEval-2018 o klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa u znanstvenoj literaturi za čiste (podpitanje 1.1) i bučne podatke (podpitanje 1.2). Uspoređujemo dva modela za klasifikaciju, C-LSTM koji koristi samo priključenje riječi i SVM koji također uzima u obzir i napravljene karakteristike. Da se prilagodimo domenu nauke, treniramo riječi ugrađenje na znanstvenim papirima skupljenim iz arXiva. org. Ručno izrađene karakteristike sastoje se od leksičkih karakteristika za model semantičkih odnosa, kao i entitata između kojih se odnos drži. Klasifikacija odnosa s primjenom uključenja (ClaiRE) postigla je rezultat F1 od 74,89% za prvi podpitanje i 78,39% za drugi.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме нашата система за задача 7 за класификация на семантичните взаимоотношения в научната литература за чисти (подзадача 1.1) и шумни данни (подзадача 1.2). Сравняваме два модела за класификация, който използва само вграждания на думи и който също отчита ръчно изработените функции. За да се адаптираме към областта на науката, обучаваме вграждането на думи върху научни статии, събрани от арХИВ. org. Ръчно изработените особености се състоят от лексикални особености, които моделират семантичните отношения, както и същностите, между които съществува връзката. Класификацията на отношенията с помощта на вграждания (Класификацията на отношенията с помощта на вграждания (Класификацията на отношенията с помощта на вграждания) постига резултат от 74,89% за първата подзадача и 78,39% за втората.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunaelezea mfumo wetu wa kazi ya SemEval-2018 kuhusu usambazaji wa mahusiano ya kimapenzi katika fasihi ya kisayansi kwa ajili ya safi (subira 1.1) na takwimu za kelele (kazi ya chini ya ujumbe wa 1.2). Tunawalinganisha mifano miwili kwa ajili ya kutafsiri, C-LSTM ambayo inatumia maneno yanayotumika pekee na SVM ambayo pia inachukua vipengele vya mikononi. Ili kuunganisha na maeneo ya sayansi tunafundisha maneno yanayotumika kwenye karatasi za sayansi zilizokusanywa kutoka arXiv. org. Tamko zilizopangwa mikononi ni pamoja na vipengele vya lexico vya kutengeneza mahusiano ya kimapenzi pamoja na vitu ambavyo mahusiano yanahusiana. Uhusiano wa mahusiano kwa kutumia Mambo ya Ndege (ClaiRE) ulipata score ya F1 ya asilimia 74.89 kwa ajili ya ujumbe wa kwanza na asilimia 78.39 kwa pili.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는SemEval-18퀘스트7의 시스템을 묘사했는데 이 퀘스트7은 청결(자퀘스트1.1)과 소음 데이터(자퀘스트1.2) 과학 문헌에서 의미 관계의 분류와 관련된다.우리는 두 가지 분류 모델을 비교했다. 하나는 단어만 삽입된 C-LSTM이고, 다른 하나는 수동 특징을 고려한 SVM이다.과학 분야에 적응하기 위해 우리는 ARXiv에서 수집한 과학 논문에 단어 삽입을 훈련한다.조직수동으로 구축된 특징은 어휘 특징으로 구성되어 모형의 의미 관계와 관계에 포함된 실체에 사용된다.삽입(ClaiRE)을 사용하여 관계를 분류한 결과 첫 번째 하위 임무의 F1은 74.89%, 두 번째 하위 임무의 F1은 78.39%로 나타났다.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne përshkruajmë sistemin tonë për SemEval-2018 Task 7 mbi klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve semantike në literaturën shkencore për të dhënat e pastra (nënpyetje 1.1) dhe zhurmëshme (nënpyetje 1.2). Ne krahasojmë dy modele për klasifikimin, një C-LSTM i cili përdorë vetëm përfshirje fjalësh dhe një SVM që gjithashtu merr parasysh karakteristikat e ndërtuar me dorë. Për të përshtatur në fushën e shkencës ne trajnojmë përfshirjen e fjalëve në dokumentet shkencore të mbledhura nga arXiv. org. Karakteristikat e ndërtuar me dorë përbëhen nga karakteristikat lexike për të modeluar marrëdhëniet semantike si dhe njësitë midis të cilave mban marrëdhënia. Klasifikimi i Marrëdhënieve duke përdorur Embeddings (ClaiRE) arriti një rezultat F1 prej 74.89% për nënpyetjen e parë dhe 78.39% për të dytën.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ سیستم ما برای تابع 7 نیمه\u200cی سال ۲۰۱۸ درباره\u200cی برنامه\u200cبندی رابطه\u200cهای طبیعی در ادبیات علمی برای پاک (پایین\u200cپرس ۱.۱) و داده\u200cهای صوتی (پایین\u200cپرس ۱.۲) توصیف می\u200cکنیم. ما دو مدل برای گروهی مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، یک C-LSTM که تنها استفاده می\u200cکند ابتدایی کلمه\u200cها و یک SVM که همچنین ویژگی\u200cهای دستی\u200cسازی را به حساب می\u200cگیرد. برای تغییر دادن به دامنه علم ما کلمه\u200cها را در کاغذهای علمی که از ارکیو جمع شده\u200cاند آموزش می\u200cدهیم. org. ویژگی\u200cهای دستی\u200cساخته شده از ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی برای مدل رابطه\u200cهای semantic و ویژگی\u200cهای بین آن رابطه است. کلاس ارتباط با استفاده از انجمن (ClaiRE) یک امتیاز F1 از 74.89 درصد برای اولین سوپرس و 78.39 درصد برای دوم رسید.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ለSemEval-2018 ስራችን 7 ለሳይንዊ litterature የsemantic ግንኙነት ለንጹሕ (Subtask 1.1) እና የድምፅ ዳታዎችን (Submission 1.2) በማስተካከል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሁለትን ምሳሌዎች ለመግለጫ እናስመስላታለን፣ የC-LSTM ቃላትን ብቻውን የሚጠቅምበት እና እጆቹ እጥፍ የተደረገውን የSVM ምርጫዎች ይቆጥራል፡፡ የሳይንስ አካባቢዎች ቃላትን ለማስተካከል እናስተማራለን፡፡ org እጁ-እጁ የደረጃ ምርጫዎች የሴሜንቲካ ግንኙነትን እና ግንኙነት የሚይዘውን አካባቢዎች ማስተካከል ነው፡፡ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት (ClaiRE) ለመጀመሪያው ደብዳቤ 74.89 በመቶ የF1 score አግኝቷል፥ ለሁለተኛውም 78.39 በመቶ አግኝቷል።', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel vir SemEval-2018 Opdrag 7 oor klasifikasie van semantiese verwantings in wetenskaplike literateer vir skoon (ondersoek 1.1) en geluidige data (ondersoek 1.2). Ons vergelyk twee modele vir klasifikasie, 'n C- LSTM wat slegs woord inbêding gebruik en 'n SVM wat ook handkryfde funksies in rekening neem. Om aan die domein van wetenskap te pas, tref ons woord inbettings op wetenskaplike papier wat van arXiv versamel is. org. Die hand-gebruikte funksies bestaan van leksiese funksies om die semantiese verhouding te model en die entiteite tussen wat die verhouding hou. Klassifikasie van Relasies met gebruik van Inbettings (ClaiRE) het 'n F1 telling van 74.89% bereik vir die eerste subvraag en 78.39% vir die tweede.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করছি বৈজ্ঞানিক সাহিত্যে সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক পরিষ্কার (সাবটাস ১. ১) এব আমরা শ্রেণীবিভাগের জন্য দুটি মডেল তুলনা করি, একটি সি-এলস্টিএম, যা শুধুমাত্র শব্দ ব্যবহার করে ব্যবহার করে এবং একটি এসভিএম, যা হাতে হ্যান্ বিজ্ঞানের ডোমেইনের সাথে যুক্ত হওয়ার জন্য আমরা বৈজ্ঞানিক কাগজের বিষয়ে শব্দ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করি। org. org হাতের প্রাপ্ত বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে লেক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্য রয়েছে যাতে সেমান্টিক সম্পর্ক মডেল করা যায় এবং যে সমস্ত বস্তুর মধ্য এমবেডিং ব্যবহার করে সম্পর্কের ক্লাসিফিং (ক্লায়েরি) প্রথম সাবটাসের জন্য ৭৪. ৮৯% এবং দ্বিতীয় সেকেন্ডের জন্য ৭৮.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz SemEval-2018 Taýgyzy 7-nji sistemamyzy ylmy edebiýatyýasynda semantik ilişkiler klasifikasynda (1.1-asty sorag) we sesli maglumatlarymyzy tassykladyrys. Biz klasifikasiýa üçin iki nusgany çykarýarys, bir C-LSTM diňe sözleri girişdirilýän we bir SVM üçin elimden çykan hatlary ulanýar. Ilmi sahypalara üýtgetmek üçin biz arXiv'den toplanýan bilim kagytlarynda söz guralşyny öwredýäris. org. Eli çapşyran özellikler semantik baglaýyşlary we baglaýyşyň arasyndaky guramlary üçin leksiýaly özelliklerden bar. Referanslar ulanan sözlerniň klasifikasyýasy ilkinji süýtgetmek üçin 74,89% we ikinji süýtgetmek üçin 78,39% ýetdi.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր համակարգը "Սեմեվալ 2018"-ի 7. հանձնարարությունը, որը վերաբերում է գիտական գրականության սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների դասակարգումը մաքուր (ենթահարց 1.1) և աղմկոտ տվյալների համար (ենթահարց 1.2): We compare two models for classification, a C-LSTM which utilizes only word embeddings and an SVM that also takes handcrafted features into account.  Որպեսզի հարմարվենք գիտության ոլորտում, մենք վարժեցնում ենք արքսիվից հավաքված գիտական փաստաթղթերի բառերը: org The hand-crafted features consist of lexical features to model the semantic relations as well as the entities between which the relation holds.  Կաջակցությունների դասակարգումը, օգտագործելով ներգրավված գործիքներ (ԿլայՌ), հասավ F1 գնահատականի 74.89 տոկոսի առաջին ենթահարցում և 78.39 տոկոսի երկրորդ ենթահարցում:', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naš sistem za zadatak 7 za semiEval-2018 o klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa u naučnoj literaturi za čiste (podpitanje 1.1) i bučne podatke (podpitanje 1.2). Uspoređujemo dva modela za klasifikaciju, C-LSTM koji koristi samo ugrađenje riječi i SVM koji također uzima u obzir i napravljene karakteristike. Da se prilagodimo domenu nauke treniramo integraciju riječi na naučnim papirima skupljenim iz arXiva. org. Ručno izrađene karakteristike sastoje se od leksičkih karakteristika za model semantičkih odnosa, kao i entitata između kojih se odnos drži. Klasifikacija odnosa koristeći integracije (ClaiRE) postigla je rezultat F1 od 74,89% za prvu podpitanju i 78,39% za drugu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldame SemEval-2018 ülesande 7 semantiliste suhete klassifitseerimise süsteemi teaduskirjanduses puhaste (alaülesanne 1.1) ja mürakate andmete (alaülesanne 1.2) jaoks. Võrdleme klassifitseerimiseks kahte mudelit: C-LSTM, mis kasutab ainult sõna manustamist, ja SVM, mis võtab arvesse ka käsitöö funktsioone. Teaduse valdkonnaga kohanemiseks koolitame arXiv-st kogutud teaduslikele dokumentidele sõnade manustamist. org. Käsitsi valmistatud omadused koosnevad leksikaalsetest omadustest, mis modelleerivad semantilisi suhteid ja olemeid, mille vahel seos hoiab. Seoste klassifitseerimine manustamise abil saavutas F1 skoori 74,89% esimese alamülesande ja 78,39% teise alamülesande puhul.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme náš systém pro SemEval-2018 Task 7 na klasifikaci sémantických vztahů ve vědecké literatuře pro čistá (podúkol 1.1) a šumová data (podúkol 1.2). Porovnáváme dva modely pro klasifikaci, C-LSTM, který využívá pouze vložení slov, a SVM, který bere v úvahu také ručně vyrobené funkce. Abychom se přizpůsobili oblasti vědy, trénujeme vkládání slov na vědeckých pracích shromážděných z arXiv. organizace. Ručně vytvořené rysy se skládají z lexikálních rysů pro modelování sémantických vztahů a entit, mezi nimiž vztah drží. Klasifikace vztahů pomocí vložení (ClaiRE) dosáhla F1 skóre 74,89% pro první podúkol a 78,39% pro druhý.', 'az': 'Bu kağıtda SemEval-2018 Task 7 sistemimizi təmiz (1.1 subtask) və səsl verilər (1.2 subtask) üçün semantik ilişkilərin klasifikasyonu təsdiqləyirik. Biz klasifikasyon üçün iki modeli, C-LSTM ilə birləşdiririk ki, sadəcə sözləri birləşdirir və əl yaratdığı özellikləri də hesablayır. Bilim sahəsinə uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün arXiv tərəfindən toplanmış elmi kağıtlara sözləri təhsil edirik. org. Əl yaradılmış xüsusiyyətlər semantik əlaqələri və aralarındakı əlaqələr olan məlumatların modellərindən olub. İçərilərini istifadə edən İlişkilərin klasifikasyonu (ClaiRE) ilk subask üçün 74,89 % F1 dərəcəsini və ikinci dərəcəsini 78,39 % qəbul etdi.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme SemEval-2018 Task 7 -järjestelmää semanttisten suhteiden luokittelusta tieteellisessä kirjallisuudessa puhtaalle (alatehtävä 1.1) ja meluisalle datalle (alatehtävä 1.2). Vertailemme luokittelussa kahta mallia, C-LSTM-mallia, jossa käytetään vain sanaupotuksia, ja SVM-mallia, jossa otetaan huomioon myös käsityönä tehdyt ominaisuudet. Sopeutuaksemme tieteen alueeseen harjoittelemme sanaupotuksia arXiv:stä kerättyihin tieteellisiin julkaisuihin. org. Käsintehdyt ominaisuudet koostuvat sanastosta, jotka mallintavat semanttisia suhteita sekä entiteettejä, joiden välillä suhde on. Suhteiden luokittelu upotuksia käyttäen (Claire) saavutti F1-pisteen 74,89% ensimmäisessä alatehtävässä ja 78,39% toisessa.', 'ca': "En aquest paper descrivim el nostre sistema de SemEval-2018 Task 7 sobre la classificació de relacions semàntiques en la literatura científica per a dades netes (subtanya 1.1) i ruidoses (subtanya 1.2). Comparem dos models de classificació, un C-LSTM que només utilitza integracions de paraules i un SVM que també té en compte característiques artificials. Per adaptar-nos al domini de la ciència entrenem les paraules incorporades en articles científics recollits d'arXiv. org. Les característiques artificials consisteixen en característiques lècsiques per modelar les relacions semàntiques i les entitats entre les quals es manté la relació. La classificació de relacions amb Embeddings (ClaiRE) va aconseguir una puntuació F1 del 74,89% per la primera subpregunta i del 78,39% per la segona.", 'jv': 'Nan pepulan iki kita dadi sistem kanggo seminval-2008 task 7 ing panjenengan kelas semanti babagan ning basa siyendigo sing arep (suptakon 1.1) lan data kebebasan (suptakon 1.2). Two Daftar sampeyan ing domain of Sayensi sing paling kelas embedding word on paper sager org. Bocah-bocah sing dibutuhke dipunangé luwih operasi kanggo model sing gagal semanti karo ingkang dipunangé sing ngregani bengko Kelaseki Relahan sing gambar embedding (CLiR) pengguna F1 sing menyang karo 75.64% kanggo basa tualke tualke sampeyan lan 75.9% kanggo segondé.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנחנו מתארים את המערכת שלנו עבור SemEval-2018 משימה 7 על קליפורת יחסים סמנטיים בספרות מדעית לנקות (subtask 1.1) ומידע רעש (subtask 1.2). אנחנו משוותים שני דוגמנים להקליטה, C-LSTM אשר משתמש רק בתכנית מילים ו SVM אשר גם לוקח בחשבון תכונות יצירת יד. כדי להתאים לתחום המדע, אנחנו מאמן מילים על מסמכים מדעיים שנאספו מארקסיב. org. האופיינים שנעשו ביד כוללים מאפיינים לקסיים כדי לדוגמא את מערכות היחסים הסמנטיות כמו גם את היחידות שבין הן המערכת היחסים. שיעור מערכות יחסים בשימוש בתכניות (ClaiRE) השיג נקודת F1 של 74.89% עבור התשובה הראשונה ו-78.39% עבור השנייה.', 'ha': 'A cikin wannan takarda, Munã bayyana aikin na SemEl-2018 Taimakon 7 a kan classified wa masu husũma na sakan da aka sani na takarda (sub-aikin 1.1) da data na sauti (sub-aikin 1.2). Tuna samfani da misãlai biyu ga fasalin, wani C-LSM wanda ke amfani da magana wanda ke shiga guda kawai da wani SvM wanda ya samu da tsari masu hannayen da hannayensu. To adapt to the domain of science we train word embeddings on scientific papers collected from arXiv. dictionary variant Furofatin da hannayen da ke damƙa yana daga misalin leksisi don su sami tsari ga haɗi na semanti da sami da abubuwa da ke ƙunsa da shi. Tsarin Farawa da aka amfani da Shiryawa (ClaiR) ya sãmu wata F1 score na 74.89% wa kwanan subaikin na farko da 78.39% na sakan.', 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo naš sistem za SemEval-2018 nalogo 7 o klasifikaciji semantičnih relacij v znanstveni literaturi za čiste (podnalogo 1.1) in hrupne podatke (podnalogo 1.2). Primerjamo dva modela za klasifikacijo, C-LSTM, ki uporablja samo besedne vdelave, in SVM, ki upošteva tudi ročno izdelane funkcije. Da bi se prilagodili področju znanosti, usposabljamo vgradnjo besed na znanstvene članke, zbrane iz arXiv. org. Ročno izdelane značilnosti sestavljajo leksikalne značilnosti za modeliranje semantičnih odnosov in entitet, med katerimi je odnos. Klasifikacija relacij z uporabo vdelav (ClaiRE) je dosegla rezultat F1 74,89% za prvo podnalogo in 78,39% za drugo podnalogo.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་SemEval-2018 Task 7་གཟུགས་རིས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་བ(subtask 1.1) དང་ We compare two models for classification, a C-LSTM which uses only word embeddings and an SVM that also takes handcrafted features into account. ང་ཚོས་ཚན་རིག་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་ཚན་རིག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྦྱར་ཡོད་པ་དང་། org. ལག་ཅིག་གཟུགས་པའི་ཆ་རྣམས་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོ་ཡོད། ཨ་རིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་གི་དབྱེ་སེལ་འཛིན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་མཚམས་དང་བརྗོད་'}
{'en': 'NTNU at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'ar': 'NTNU في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: مجموعة المصنف لتحديد العلاقات الدلالية والتصنيف في الأوراق العلمية', 'pt': 'NTNU no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Conjunto de Classificadores para Identificação e Classificação de Relações Semânticas em Artigos Científicos', 'fr': "NTNU au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Assemblage de classificateurs pour l'identification et la classification des relations sémantiques dans les articles scientifiques", 'es': 'NTNU en SemEval-2018 Tarea 7: Ensamblaje de clasificadores para la identificación y clasificación de relaciones semánticas en artículos científicos', 'ja': 'NTNU at SemEval -2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'zh': 'NTNU在SemEval-2018务7:器合科学论文语义识别', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 पर NTNU: वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में शब्दार्थ संबंध पहचान और वर्गीकरण के लिए क्लासिफायर Ensembling', 'ru': 'НТНУ на SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'ga': 'NTNU ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Aicmitheoir Inchomhshamhlaithe le hAghaidh an Chaidrimh Shéimeantaigh a Aithint agus a Aicmiú i bPáipéir Eolaíoch', 'hu': 'NTNU a SemEval-2018 7. feladat: A szemantikus kapcsolatok azonosítására és osztályozására szolgáló osztályozó együttes tudományos dolgozatokban', 'ka': 'NTNU semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 7: სემენტიკური განსაზღვრება და კლასიფიკაცია მეცნიერო დოკუმენტებში', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Συγκρότημα ταξινομητών για τον προσδιορισμό και την ταξινόμηση σημασιολογικών σχέσεων σε επιστημονικές εργασίες', 'it': "NTNU al SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classificatore Ensembling per l'identificazione e la classificazione delle relazioni semantiche nei documenti scientifici", 'kk': 'NTNU 7. тапсырмасындағы semiEval-2018 тапсырмасы: ғылыми құжаттардың семантикалық қатынасын идентификациялау және классификациялау үшін классификациялау', 'lt': 'NTNU 2010 m. pusmetio vertinimo 7 užduotis: Semantinių santykių identifikavimo ir klasifikavimo moksliniuose dokumentuose užtikrinimo klasifikatorius', 'mk': 'NTNU на SemEval-2018 задача 7: Класификаторски ансемплинг за идентификација и класификација на семантичките односи во научните документи', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7: സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനും ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d ക്ലാസിഫയര്\u200d ഏന്\u200dസിമില്\u200d ക്ലാസിഫയര്\u200d ഏന്\u200d', 'mn': 'NTNU at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensemantic Relations Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'ms': 'NTNU di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Pengeklasifikasi Pengeklasifikasi Hubungan Semantik dan Pengeklasifikasi dalam Dokumen Saintifik', 'no': 'NTNU at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Klassifisering for semiantisk relasjonsidentifikasjon og klassifikasjon i vitenskapelige papir', 'pl': 'NTNU w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 7: Zespół klasyfikacyjny do identyfikacji i klasyfikacji relacji semantycznych w pracach naukowych', 'mt': 'NTNU f’SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'sr': 'NTNU na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: klasifikacija za identifikaciju i klasifikaciju semantičkih odnosa u naučnim papirima', 'ro': 'NTNU la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 7: Ansamblul clasificator pentru identificarea și clasificarea relațiilor semantice în lucrările științifice', 'so': 'NTNU at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relations Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'si': 'NTNA at semeval-2018 Job 7: Classified Ensembling for semantic Attendee ID and Classication in science papers', 'sv': 'NTNU på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Klassificeringsensemblering för Semantic Relation Identifiering och Klassificering i vetenskapliga artiklar', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 7: அறிவியல் தாள்களில் Semantic Relations Identification and Classification for Classifier Ensembling', 'ur': 'NTNU at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relations Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Định dạng phân tách phân loại phân loại phân loại', 'bg': 'НТНУ в Задача 7: Класификационен ансамбъл за идентификация и класификация на семантичната връзка в научни статии', 'nl': 'NTNU bij SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Classifier Ensemble voor Semantische Relatie Identificatie en Classificatie in Wetenschappelijke Papers', 'hr': 'NTNU na zadatku 7: klasifikacija za identifikaciju i klasifikaciju semantičkih odnosa u znanstvenim papirima', 'ko': 'NTNU가SemEval-18임무7: 과학논문에서 의미관계 식별과 분류의 분류기 통합', 'da': 'NTNU på SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identifikation og Klassificering i Videnskabelige Papirer', 'de': 'NTNU bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 7: Klassifikations-Ensemble zur semantischen Beziehungsidentifikation und Klassifizierung in wissenschaftlichen Aufsätzen', 'sw': 'NTNU kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 7: Kutambua Makosa kwa Kutambuliwa na Kuhitimisha Kuhusiana na Kisemantic katika Makala ya Sayansi', 'id': 'NTNU di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'fa': 'NTNU در ماموریت شماره ۲۰۱۸: دسترسی کلاس\u200cدهنده برای شناسایی و کلاس\u200cشناسایی رابطه\u200cهای منطقی در روزنامه\u200cهای علمی', 'tr': 'NTNU at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'hy': 'ԴՆԹ 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի 7. հանձնարարությունը: Սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման դասակարգիչը գիտական փաստաթղթերում', 'af': 'NTNU by SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Klassifiseerder Uitbreiding vir Semantiese Relasie Identifikasie en Klassifikasie in Wetenskaplike Papiere', 'sq': 'NTNU në SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'az': 'NTNU at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Semantic Relationship Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৭: সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক পরিচিতি এবং বৈজ্ঞানিক পত্রিকা', 'am': 'ስራ 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'ca': 'NTNU a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers', 'bs': 'NTNU na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: klasifikacija za identifikaciju i klasifikaciju semantičkih odnosa u naučnim papirima', 'et': 'NTNU SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 7: Klassifikaatorite ansambel semantiliste suhete identifitseerimiseks ja klassifitseerimiseks teaduslikes artiklites', 'cs': 'NTNU na SemEval-2018 Úkol 7: Sestavování klasifikátorů pro identifikaci a klasifikaci sémantických vztahů ve vědeckých článcích', 'fi': 'NTNU SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Luokitusjoukkue semanttisen suhteen tunnistamiseen ja luokitteluun tieteellisissä julkaisuissa', 'jv': 'UTNU at semiinval-2008 task 7: CLSSYFUTC', 'ha': 'NTNU at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 7: Classifier Ensembler for Semantic Relation Ididation and Classification in Sayanin Aiki', 'sk': 'NTNU na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Klasifikacijski ansambl za identifikacijo in klasifikacijo semantičnih odnosov v znanstvenih člankih', 'he': 'NTNU ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 7: מסגרת מסגרת לזיהוי יחסים סמנטיים והמסגרת במסמכים מדעיים', 'bo': 'NTNU at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Classifier Ensembling for Semantic Relation Identification and Classification in Scientific Papers'}
{'en': 'The paper presents NTNU’s contribution to SemEval-2018 Task 7 on relation identification and classification. The class weights and parameters of five alternative supervised classifiers were optimized through grid search and cross-validation. The outputs of the classifiers were combined through voting for the final prediction. A wide variety of features were explored, with the most informative identified by feature selection. The best setting achieved F1 scores of 47.4 % and 66.0 % in the relation classification subtasks 1.1 and 1.2. For relation identification and classification in subtask 2, it achieved F1 scores of 33.9 % and 17.0 %,', 'ar': 'تقدم الورقة مساهمة NTNU في SemEval-2018 Task 7 بشأن تحديد العلاقة وتصنيفها. تم تحسين أوزان ومعلمات الفئة لخمسة مصنفات بديلة خاضعة للإشراف من خلال البحث الشبكي والتحقق من الصحة. تم دمج مخرجات المصنفات من خلال التصويت على التنبؤ النهائي. تم استكشاف مجموعة متنوعة من الميزات ، مع تحديد الميزة الأكثر إفادة. حقق أفضل إعداد درجات F1 بنسبة 47.4٪ و 66.0٪ في المهام الفرعية لتصنيف العلاقة 1.1 و 1.2. لتحديد العلاقة وتصنيفها في المهمة الفرعية 2 ، حققت درجات F1 بنسبة 33.9٪ و 17.0٪ ،', 'es': 'El documento presenta la contribución de NTNU a la Tarea 7 de SemEval-2018 sobre identificación y clasificación de relaciones. Las ponderaciones de clase y los parámetros de cinco clasificadores supervisados alternativos se optimizaron mediante la búsqueda de cuadrículas y la validación cruzada. Los resultados de los clasificadores se combinaron mediante la votación de la predicción final. Se exploró una amplia variedad de funciones, y las más informativas se identificaron mediante la selección de características. La mejor configuración logró puntuaciones F1 de 47.4% y 66.0% en las subtareas de clasificación de relación 1.1 y 1.2. Para la identificación y clasificación de relaciones en la subtarea 2, obtuvo puntuaciones F1 del 33,9% y el 17,0%,', 'fr': "L'article présente la contribution de NTNU à la tâche 7 de SEMEval-2018 sur l'identification et la classification des relations. Les poids de classe et les paramètres de cinq classificateurs supervisés alternatifs ont été optimisés grâce à la recherche par grille et à la validation croisée. Les sorties des classificateurs ont été combinées en votant pour la prédiction finale. Une grande variété de fonctionnalités ont été explorées, les plus informatives étant identifiées par la sélection des caractéristiques. Le meilleur réglage a obtenu des scores F1 de 47,4\xa0% et 66,0\xa0% dans les sous-tâches de classification des relations 1.1 et 1.2. Pour l'identification et la classification des relations dans la sous-tâche 2, il a obtenu des scores F1 de 33,9\xa0% et 17,0\xa0%,", 'pt': 'O artigo apresenta a contribuição da NTNU para a Tarefa 7 do SemEval-2018 sobre identificação e classificação de relações. Os pesos de classe e os parâmetros de cinco classificadores supervisionados alternativos foram otimizados por meio de busca em grade e validação cruzada. As saídas dos classificadores foram combinadas por meio de votação para a previsão final. Uma grande variedade de recursos foi explorada, com os mais informativos identificados pela seleção de recursos. A melhor configuração obteve escores F1 de 47,4% e 66,0% nas subtarefas de classificação de relação 1.1 e 1.2. Para identificação e classificação da relação na subtarefa 2, obteve escores F1 de 33,9% e 17,0%,', 'ja': '論文は、関係の識別と分類に関するSemEval -2018タスク7に対するNTNUの貢献を紹介している。5つの代替の監視された分類子のクラスの重みとパラメータは、グリッド検索と相互検証を通じて最適化されました。最終予測のための投票を通じて、分類子の出力を組み合わせた。多種多様な特徴を探求し、特徴選択によって最も情報量の多い特徴を特定した。ベストセッティングは、関係分類サブタスク1.1と1.2でF 1スコア47.4%、66.0%を達成した。サブタスク2の関係識別と分類では、33.9%と17.0%のF 1スコアを達成し、', 'zh': '本文言NTNUSemEval-2018识类7献。 以网格搜验之,5种代督分器之重参数优化之。 分器之输投票并以终其占。 求其百端,以定其最翔实。 最上置 1.1 、 1.2 中各得 47.4% 、 66.0% F1 分数。 子职2别,得33.9%17.0%F1分。', 'hi': 'पेपर संबंध पहचान और वर्गीकरण पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 में NTNU के योगदान को प्रस्तुत करता है। पांच वैकल्पिक पर्यवेक्षित क्लासिफायरों के वर्ग भार और मापदंडों को ग्रिड खोज और क्रॉस-सत्यापन के माध्यम से अनुकूलित किया गया था। क्लासिफायरके आउटपुट को अंतिम भविष्यवाणी के लिए मतदान के माध्यम से जोड़ा गया था। सुविधाओं की एक विस्तृत विविधता का पता लगाया गया था, जिसमें सुविधा चयन द्वारा पहचाने जाने वाले सबसे अधिक जानकारीपूर्ण थे। सबसे अच्छी सेटिंग ने संबंध वर्गीकरण उप-कार्यों 1.1 और 1.2 में 47.4% और 66.0% के F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किए। सबटास्क 2 में संबंध पहचान और वर्गीकरण के लिए, इसने 33.9% और 17.0% के F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किए,', 'ru': 'В документе представлен вклад НТНУ в задачу 7 SemEval-2018 по идентификации и классификации отношений. Веса и параметры классов пяти альтернативных контролируемых классификаторов были оптимизированы посредством поиска по сетке и перекрестной валидации. Результаты работы классификаторов были объединены путем голосования по окончательному прогнозу. Были изучены самые разнообразные признаки, наиболее информативные из которых были выявлены при выборе признаков. Лучшая настройка достигла F1 47,4% и 66,0% в подзадачах 1.1 и 1.2 классификации отношений. Для идентификации и классификации отношения в подзадаче 2 она достигла F1 баллов 33,9% и 17,0%,', 'ga': 'Cuirtear i láthair sa pháipéar an méid a chuir NTNU le Tasc 7 SemEval-2018 ar shainaithint agus ar rangú caidrimh. Optamaíodh meáchain ranga agus paraiméadair cúig aicmitheora maoirsithe malartacha trí chuardach greille agus tras-bhailíochtú. Cuireadh aschuir na n-aicmitheoirí le chéile trí vótáil don tuar deiridh. Scrúdaíodh raon leathan gnéithe, agus sainaithníodh na cinn is faisnéiseach le roghnú na ngnéithe. Bhain an suíomh ab fhearr scóir F1 de 47.4% agus 66.0% amach sna fothascanna aicmithe coibhneasta 1.1 agus 1.2. Maidir le haithint agus aicmiú caidrimh i bhfothasc 2, bhain sé scóir F1 de 33.9% agus 17.0%,', 'ka': 'დაახლობა NTNU-ის დამატება SemEval-2018 დავალების 7 დავალების შესახებ ინდენტიფიკაციის და კლასიფიკაციის შესახებ. ხუთი ალტენტრუმენტური დამართებული კლასიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციის სიმაღლე და პარამეტრები აპტიმიზებულია მხარეს ძიება და გადამოწმება. კლასიფიკაციის გამოსახულებები კომბინეცირებულია, რომლებიც ბოლო წინასწარმოდგენისთვის გადაწყვეტა. მნიშვნელოვანი განსხვავებები განსხვავებულია, ყველაზე ინფორმატიური განსხვავებული ფუნქციების გამოყენებით. ყველაზე საუკეთესო პარამეტრები მიიღეთ F1 წარმოდგენები 47, 4% და 66, 0% წარმოდგენების კლასიფიკაციაში 1, 1 და 1, 2 წარმოდგენებით. შესახებ ინდინტიფიკაციის და კლასიფიკაციის შესახებ 2-ში, ეს მიიღეთ 33,9% და 17,0%-ის F1 წერტილი,', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja az NTNU hozzájárulását a kapcsolatok azonosításáról és osztályozásáról szóló SemEval-2018 Task 7-hez. Öt alternatív felügyelt osztályozó osztálysúlyát és paramétereit rácskereséssel és keresztvalidálással optimalizáltuk. Az osztályozók eredményeit a végső előrejelzés megszavazásával kombináltuk. A funkciók széles választékát vizsgálták fel, a leginformációsabbat a funkciók kiválasztásával azonosították. A legjobb beállítás 47,4%-os és 66,0%-os F1 pontszámot ért el az 1.1 és 1.2 arányban. A kapcsolatok azonosítása és osztályozása a 2. résztevékenységben 33,9%-os F1 pontszámot ért el,', 'el': 'Η εργασία παρουσιάζει τη συμβολή του στην εργασία 7 για τον προσδιορισμό και την ταξινόμηση σχέσεων. Τα βάρη κλάσης και οι παράμετροι πέντε εναλλακτικών εποπτευόμενων ταξινομητών βελτιστοποιήθηκαν μέσω αναζήτησης πλέγματος και διασταυρούμενης επικύρωσης. Τα αποτελέσματα των ταξινομητών συνδυάστηκαν μέσω ψηφοφορίας για την τελική πρόβλεψη. Εξετάστηκε μια μεγάλη ποικιλία χαρακτηριστικών, με τα πιο ενημερωτικά να προσδιορίζονται με την επιλογή χαρακτηριστικών. Η καλύτερη ρύθμιση πέτυχε βαθμολογίες F1 47.4% και 66.0% στις υποτάξεις ταξινόμησης σχέσης 1.1 και 1.2. Για τον προσδιορισμό και την ταξινόμηση των σχέσεων στο δευτερεύον ερώτημα 2, πέτυχε βαθμολογίες F1 33,9% και 17,0%,', 'lt': 'Dokumente pateikiamas NTNU indėlis į SemEval-2018 7 užduotį dėl santykių identifikavimo ir klasifikavimo. Penkių alternatyvių prižiūrimų klasifikatorių klasės svoriai ir parametrai buvo optimizuoti paieškant tinklą ir kryžminiu patvirtinimu. Klasifikatorių rezultatai buvo sujungti balsuojant už galutinę prognozę. Buvo išnagrinėtos įvairios ypatybės, o ypatybių atrankos būdu nustatyta labiausiai informacinė informacija. The best setting achieved F1 scores of 47.4% and 66.0% in the relation classification subtasks 1.1 and 1.2.  Siekiant nustatyti santykius ir klasifikuoti 2 papunktyje, ji pasiekė F1 rezultatus 33,9 % ir 17,0 %,', 'it': "L'articolo presenta il contributo di NTNU al SemEval-2018 Task 7 sull'identificazione e classificazione delle relazioni. I pesi di classe e i parametri di cinque classificatori supervisionati alternativi sono stati ottimizzati attraverso la ricerca della griglia e la convalida incrociata. I risultati dei classificatori sono stati combinati attraverso il voto per la previsione finale. Sono state esplorate un'ampia varietà di caratteristiche, con le più informative identificate dalla selezione delle caratteristiche. L'impostazione migliore ha ottenuto punteggi F1 del 47,4% e 66,0% nelle sottoattività di classificazione 1.1 e 1.2. Per l'identificazione delle relazioni e la classificazione nella sottomissione 2, ha ottenuto punteggi F1 del 33,9% e del 17,0%,", 'kk': 'Қағаз NTNU жарым- 2018 тапсырмасының идентификациясы мен классификациясы туралы 7- тапсырмасына қатынасын көрсетеді. Бес альтернативті бақылау классының тегі мен параметрлері торды іздеу мен бірнеше тексеру арқылы оптимизацияланды. Классификациялардың шығысы соңғы таңдау үшін қосылған. Бірнеше түрлі мүмкіндіктерді іздеу керек, мүмкіндіктерді таңдау арқылы ең мәліметті белгіледі. Ең жақсы параметрлері 1, 1 және 1, 2 қатынасында 47, 4% және 66, 0% деген F1 нәтижесін жеткізді. 2- суреттің қатынасын идентификациялау мен классификациялау үшін ол 33,9% мен 17,0% F1 деңгейіне жетті,', 'mk': 'Документот го претставува придонесот на НТНУ за Семевал-2018 задача 7 за идентификација и класификација на односите. Тежините на класата и параметрите на пет алтернативни надгледувани класификатори беа оптимизирани преку пребарување на мрежата и крстовалидација. Излезите на класификаторите беа комбинирани преку гласање за конечното предвидување. Беа истражени широки различни карактеристики, со најинформативните идентификувани со изборот на карактеристики. Најдоброто поставување постигна оценки F1 од 47,4 отсто и 66,0 отсто во класификацијата на односите подоценки 1,1 и 1,2. За идентификација и класификација на односите во потпрашањето 2, таа постигна оценки F1 од 33,9 отсто и 17,0 отсто,', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d എന്\u200dടിന്\u200dയുവിന്\u200dറെ പങ്ക് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7 ക്ലാസ്റ്റ് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും ക്ലാസ്ഫി ഗ്രിഡ് തെരച്ചിലും ക്രിസ്റ്റ് പരിശോധിക്കുകയും ചെയ്ത അഞ്ച് വിറ്റെന്\u200dറ് മാറ്റം നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ക്ലാസിന അവസാനത്തെ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി വോട്ട് ചേര്\u200dന്നതിലൂടെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിള്\u200dമാരുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചിരുന്നു. വിശാലമായ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ടു, വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d 47. 4% എന്നിട്ടും 66. 0% ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d സബ്ട്ടിക്ക് 1. 1 1. 2 സബ്ബൌസിലെ ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനും വ്യവസ്ഥയ്ക്കും അത് എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് 33. 9% എന്നിട്ടും 17.0% നേടി', 'mt': 'Id-dokument jippreżenta l-kontribut tal-NTNU għas-SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7 dwar l-identifikazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. Il-piżijiet u l-parametri tal-klassi ta’ ħames klassifikaturi alternattivi sorveljati ġew ottimizzati permezz tat-tiftix tal-grilja u l-validazzjoni inkroċjata. Ir-riżultati tal-klassifikaturi ġew ikkombinati permezz tal-vot għat-tbassir finali. Ġew esplorati varjetà wiesgħa ta’ karatteristiċi, bl-aktar informazzjoni identifikata permezz tal-għażla tal-karatteristiċi. L-aħjar setting kiseb punteġġi F1 ta’ 47.4% u 66.0% fis-sottopunti tal-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjoni 1.1 u 1.2. Għall-identifikazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjoni fis-sottomistoqsija 2, kisbet punteġġi F1 ta’ 33.9% u 17.0%,', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan kontribusi NTNU ke SemEval-2018 Tugas 7 mengenai pengenalan hubungan dan klasifikasi. Berat kelas dan parameter lima pengklasifikasi terjaga alternatif telah optimum melalui gelintar grid dan pengesahihan salib. The outputs of the classifiers were combined through voting for the final prediction.  Pelbagai ciri-ciri yang luas telah dieksplorasi, dengan yang paling maklumat dikenalpasti oleh pemilihan ciri-ciri. Tetapan terbaik mencapai skor F1 47.4% dan 66.0% dalam klasifikasi hubungan subtasks 1.1 dan 1.2. For relation identification and classification in subtask 2, it achieved F1 scores of 33.9% and 17.0%,', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono wkład NTNU w SemEval-2018 Task 7 dotyczący identyfikacji i klasyfikacji relacji. Wagi klas i parametry pięciu alternatywnych nadzorowanych klasyfikatorów zostały zoptymalizowane poprzez wyszukiwanie sieci i walidację krzyżową. Wyniki klasyfikatorów zostały połączone poprzez głosowanie za ostateczną prognozą. Zbadano szeroką gamę funkcji, a najbardziej informacyjne zidentyfikowano przez wybór funkcji. Najlepsze ustawienia osiągnęły wyniki F1 47,4% i 66,0% w podzadaniach klasyfikacji relacji 1.1 i 1.2. W odniesieniu do identyfikacji relacji i klasyfikacji w podzadaniu 2 osiągnęła wyniki F1 33,9% i 17,0%,', 'no': 'Papiret viser NTNU sin bidrag til semiEval-2018 oppgåve 7 om relasjonsidentifikasjon og klassifikasjon. Klassevekten og parametrar av fem alternativ overvakte klassifikatorar vart optimalisert gjennom nettverkssøk og kryssverding. Utgåva av klassifikatorane vart kombinert gjennom stemme for den siste foregåva. Det ble utforska ein brei variasjon av funksjonar, med dei mest informativte identifiserte ved utval av funksjonar. Den beste innstillinga har oppnådd F1- poeng med 47, 4% og 66, 0% i relasjonsklassifikasjonen underspør 1, 1 og 1, 2. For relasjonsidentifikasjon og klassifikasjon i underspørjing 2, fikk han F1- poeng med 33,9% og 17,0%,', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă contribuția NTNU la SemEval-2018 Task 7 privind identificarea și clasificarea relațiilor. Greutatea clasei și parametrii a cinci clasificatori supravegheați alternativi au fost optimizați prin căutarea rețelei și validarea încrucișată. Rezultatele clasificatorilor au fost combinate prin votul pentru predicția finală. Au fost explorate o mare varietate de caracteristici, cele mai informative fiind identificate prin selectarea caracteristicilor. Cea mai bună setare a obținut scoruri F1 de 47,4% și 66,0% în subsarcinile de clasificare a relațiilor 1.1 și 1.2. Pentru identificarea relațiilor și clasificarea în subsarcina 2, a obținut scoruri F1 de 33,9% și 17,0%;', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас NTNU-ын SemEval-2018 Task 7-д хамааралтай тодорхойлолтын тухай харилцааны нэр дэвшүүлэлтийг илэрхийлж байна. Таван шинэ удирдлагатай классификаторын жин болон параметр нь гадаргуудын хайх, олон шалгалтын аргаар нэмэгдсэн. Дасгал таамаглалтын үр дүн нь төгсгөл таамаглалтын төлөө сонголтоор холбогдсон. Ихэнх төрлийн сонголтуудыг судалж, хамгийн олон мэдээллийн сонголтуудыг тодорхойлдог. Хамгийн сайн тохиолдол нь F1 хувьд 47.4% болон 66.0% хувьд 1.1 болон 1.2 хувьд гарч ирсэн. 2-р доорх асуултын харилцааны тодорхойлолт болон хуваалцааны тулд F1 оноо 33.9% болон 17.0% хүртлээ.', 'si': "The paper s presents NTNA's partition to semeval-2018 Job 7 on the link ID and classification. ප්\u200dරවේශ විශේෂය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය පහත් විශේෂය පහත් විශේෂ කරුණාකරුවන් ග්\u200dරිඩ් පරීක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. විශාල විවිධ විශේෂතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, විශේෂතාවක් තෝරණයෙන් හොයාගත්ත තියෙ හොඳම සැකසුම් සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන් F1 ස්කෝර් 47.4% සහ 66.0% සම්බන්ධතාවයේ සම්බන්ධතාවය 1.1 සහ 1.2 විතරයි. සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා, ඒක 33.9% සහ 17.0% F1 පරීක්ෂණය ලබාගත්තා,", 'so': 'Warqadda NTNU waxey ka heleysaa warqadda ku saabsan aqoonsiga xiriirka iyo fasaxa SemEval-2018 shaqo 7. Fasalka miisaan iyo parameters oo shan kala duduwan oo la ilaaliyey waxaa lagu bedelay in lagu raadiyo grid-raadinta iyo baaritaanka. Dhacdooyinka fasaxa waxaa lagu soo bandhigay codeynta ugu dambeeya. Waxaa la baaraandegay waxyaabo badan oo kala duduwan, waxaana lagu yaqaan doorashooyinka tayo-gaarka ah. The best setting achieved F1 scores of 47.4% and 66.0% in the relation classification subtasks 1.1 and 1.2.  Aqoonsiga xiriirka iyo fasaxa shabakadda 2, waxay gaadhay koox F1 oo ah 33.9 % iyo 17.0 boqolkiiba,', 'sv': 'Uppsatsen presenterar NTNU:s bidrag till SemEval-2018 Task 7 om relations identifiering och klassificering. Klassvikterna och parametrarna för fem alternativa övervakade klassificerare optimerades genom rutnätssökning och korsvalidering. Klassificeringsgruppernas resultat kombinerades genom att rösta för den slutliga prognosen. En mängd olika funktioner undersöktes, varav de mest informativa identifierades genom val av funktioner. Den bästa inställningen uppnådde F1 poäng på 47,4% och 66,0% i relationsklassificeringsdelaktiviteterna 1.1 och 1.2. För relations identifiering och klassificering i delaktivitet 2 uppnådde den F1-poäng på 33,9% och 17,0%.', 'sr': 'U novinama se prikazuje doprinos NTNU-a u zadatak 7 za semiEval-2018 o identifikaciji i klasifikaciji odnosa. Težina klase i parametri pet alternativnih nadzornih klasifikatora su optimizirani kroz pretraživanje mreže i cross-validatiranje. Rezultati klasifikatora su kombinovani glasanjem za konačnu predviđanje. Istraživana je široka raznolikost karakteristika, sa najinformativnijim identifikovanjem izbora karakteristika. Najbolji nastav postigao je rezultate F1 od 47,4% i 66,0% u odnosu na klasifikaciju podataka 1,1 i 1,2. Za identifikaciju i klasifikaciju odnosa u podpitanju 2, ostvarila je rezultate F1 od 33,9% i 17,0%,', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ NTNU کی نصف Eval-2018 ٹاکس 7 کے ساتھ رابطہ شناسایی اور کلاسیفون کے بارے میں حصہ پیش کرتا ہے. کلاس وزن اور پارامیٹر پانچ alternatives supervised classifiers کے ذریعہ گریڈ تلاش اور کروس-validation کے ذریعہ اچھی کر دی گئی تھی. کلاسفار کے نتائج آخری پیش بینی کے لئے وٹ کرنے کے ذریعے جمع کئے گئے۔ بہت سی مختلف ویژگی اچھی جگہ پھیری گئی تھی، جہاں سب سے زیادہ معلومات گزینے سے پہچان دی گئی تھی. سب سے بہترین تنظیم نے 47.4% اور 66.0% کی F1 سکوٹوں کو 1.1 اور 1.2 درجے میں پہنچ لیا ہے. اس نے 33.9% اور 17.0% کی F1 اسکو پہنچایا،', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் என்னியு செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 7 தொடர்பு அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தலை பற்றி செய்யும் செயலுக்கு NTNU செயல்பாட்ட வகுப்பு எடைகள் மற்றும் அளபுருகள் 5 மாற்று பராமரிக்கப்பட்ட வகுப்பாளர்களின் வகுப்பு எடைகள் மற்றும் கட்டு தேடுதல் மற்றும் க வகுப்பினரின் வெளியீடு குணங்கள் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பால் குறிப்பிட்ட பல்வேறு குணங்கள் கண்டறியப்பட்டது. சிறந்த அமைப்புகள் 47. 4% மற்றும் 66. 0% தொடர்பு வகைப்படுத்தல் துணை பணிகளில் F1 மதிப்புகள் அடைந்தது 1. 1 மற்றும் 1. 2. துணை பணி 2-ல் தொடர்பு அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு, அது F1 புள்ளிகள் 33.9% மற்றும் 17.0%,', 'uz': "Qogʻoz & # 160; tashqari & # 160; tashqari SemEval-2018 Vazifani & # 160; tashqari & # 160; tashqari & # 160; tashqari & # 160; ishlatish va nasifif Name Klassizlarning natijalari oxirgi diqqat uchun voting orqali birlashtirilgan. @ info Yuqori moslamalar darajalashtirish tugmalarida 47.4% va 66.0% foydalanadi 1. 1 va 1.2. Ikkinchi vazifa bilan bogʻ'liq aniqlash va darajasining uchun u 33.9% va 17.0%'ning F1 scorini topadi,", 'vi': 'Báo cáo đưa dự án NTbây đóng góp cho SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 7 về nhận diện kết quả và phân loại. Lớp lượng và các tham số của năm phân loại được giám sát khác nhau được tối ưu hóa nhờ lưới tìm kiếm và kiểm tra chéo. Kết hợp kết quả của các phân loại bằng cách bỏ phiếu cho dự đoán cuối cùng. Rất nhiều tính năng được khám phá, với những thông tin nhất được xác định bởi sự chọn lọc các chức năng. Cách thiết lập tốt nhất đạt được điểm F1 của 474=và62.0=trongmức phân hạng liên kết phụ đề 1.1 và 1.2. Để xác định mối quan hệ và phân loại trong phần 2, nó đạt được điểm F1 của 33.9=. và 170=,', 'da': "Opgaven præsenterer NTNU's bidrag til SemEval-2018 Task 7 om relations identifikation og klassificering. Klassevægte og parametre for fem alternative overvågede klassificerere blev optimeret gennem gittersøgning og krydsgolidelse. Klassificeringernes output blev kombineret ved at stemme om den endelige forudsigelse. En bred vifte af funktioner blev undersøgt, hvor de mest informative identificeret ved valg af funktioner. Den bedste indstilling opnåede F1 scorer på 47,4% og 66,0% i relation klassificering underopgaver 1.1 og 1.2. For relations identifikation og klassificering i underaktivitet 2 opnåede den F1 scores på 33,9% og 17,0%.", 'nl': 'Het artikel presenteert de bijdrage van NTNU aan SemEval-2018 Taak 7 over relatienidentificatie en classificatie. De klassegewichten en parameters van vijf alternatieve begeleide classificatoren werden geoptimaliseerd door middel van grid search en cross-validatie. De outputs van de classificatoren werden gecombineerd door te stemmen voor de uiteindelijke voorspelling. Een breed scala aan functies werd onderzocht, waarbij de meest informatieve werden geïdentificeerd door de selectie van functies. De beste instelling behaalde F1 scores van 47,4% en 66,0% in de relatieklassificatie subtaken 1.1 en 1.2. Voor de identificatie en classificatie van relaties in subtaak 2 bereikte het F1-scores van 33,9% en 17,0%,', 'bg': 'Статията представя приноса на НТНУ към задача 7 за идентифициране и класификация на отношенията. Теглото на класовете и параметрите на пет алтернативни контролирани класификатора бяха оптимизирани чрез търсене в мрежата и кръстосано валидиране. Резултатите от класификаторите бяха комбинирани чрез гласуване за окончателната прогноза. Разгледани са голямо разнообразие от функции, като най-информативните са идентифицирани чрез избор на функции. Най-добрата настройка постига резултати от 47,4% и 66,0% в подзадачите за класификация на отношенията 1.1 и 1.2. За идентифициране на връзката и класификация в подзадача 2, тя постига резултати от 33,9% и 17,0%,', 'hr': 'U novinama se prikazuje doprinos NTNU-a u zadatak 7 za semiEval-2018 o identifikaciji i klasifikaciji odnosa. Težina klase i parametri pet alternativnih nadzornih klasifikatora bili su optimizirani kroz pretraživanje mreže i cross-validatiranje. Rezultati klasifikatora bili su kombinirani glasanjem za konačnu predviđanje. Istraživana je široka raznolikost karakteristika, s najinformativnijim identificiranjem izbora karakteristika. Najbolji nastav postigao je rezultate F1 od 47,4% i 66,0% u odnosu na klasifikaciju podataka 1,1 i 1,2. Za identifikaciju i klasifikaciju odnosa u podpitanju 2, postigao je rezultate F1 od 33,9% i 17,0%,', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperlihatkan kontribusi NTNU ke SemEval-2018 Tugas 7 mengenai identifikasi hubungan dan klasifikasi. Berat kelas dan parameter lima klasifikasi alternatif yang diawasi telah optimasi melalui pencarian grid dan cross-validation. Output dari klasifikasi dikombinasikan melalui pemilihan untuk prediksi akhir. Sebuah berbagai ciri-ciri yang luas telah dieksplorasi, dengan yang paling informatif dikenal oleh seleksi ciri-ciri. Seting terbaik mencapai skor F1 47,4% dan 66,0% dalam klasifikasi hubungan subtasks 1.1 dan 1.2. Untuk identifikasi hubungan dan klasifikasi di subtask 2, ia mencapai skor F1 33,9% dan 17,0%,', 'de': 'Das Papier stellt den Beitrag der NTNU zur SemEval-2018 Task 7 zur Identifikation und Klassifizierung von Beziehungen vor. Die Klassengewichte und Parameter von fünf alternativen überwachten Klassifikatoren wurden durch Rastersuche und Kreuzvalidierung optimiert. Die Ergebnisse der Klassifikatoren wurden durch Abstimmung für die endgültige Vorhersage kombiniert. Eine Vielzahl von Funktionen wurde untersucht, wobei die informativsten anhand der Feature-Auswahl identifiziert wurden. Die beste Einstellung erzielte F1-Werte von 47,4% und 66,0% in der Relationsklassifikation Teilaufgaben 1.1 und 1.2. Für die Beziehungsidentifikation und Klassifizierung in Teilaufgabe 2 erzielte sie F1-Werte von 33,9% und 17,0%,', 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linaonyesha mchango wa NTNU wa SemEval-2018 Kazi 7 kuhusu utambulisho wa uhusiano na usambazaji. Viwango vya darasa na parameter za watano mbadala waliokuwa wakifuatiliwa vizuri kwa kupitia kutafuta vifaa vya kijeshi na kutafuta uthibitisho. Matokeo ya wataalamu yaliunganishwa kwa kupiga kura kwa kutabiri ya mwisho. Tamko mbalimbali zilichunguzwa, na taarifa zaidi zinazotambuliwa na uchaguzi huu. Mpango bora zaidi ulifikia score za F1 za asilimia 47.4 na asilimia 66.0 katika kazi za usambazaji 1.1 na 1.2. Kwa kutambua mahusiano na kutafsiri katika kazi ya subira 2, ilipata vipimo vya F1 vya asilimia 33.9 na asilimia 17.0,', 'ko': '본고는 NTNU가 SemEval-18 퀘스트 7 관계 식별과 분류에 기여한 바를 소개한다.격자 검색과 교차 검증을 통해 다섯 가지 선택할 수 있는 감독 분류기의 유형 권중과 파라미터를 최적화시켰다.투표를 통해 분류기의 출력을 조합하여 최종 예측을 한다.각양각색의 특징을 연구했는데 그 중에서 정보량이 가장 많은 것은 특징 선택이다.관계 분류 하위 임무 1.1과 1.2에서 가장 잘 설정된 F1의 점수는 각각 47.4%와 66.0%였다.하위 임무 2에서 관계 식별과 분류의 F1 점수는 각각 33.9%와 17.0%로 나타났다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz NTNU'yň SemEval-2018 Görevi 7 bilen baglanyşyk we klasifikasynda maglumaty berer. 5 sany üstlenen klasörler arasynda synp ağırlygy we parametreleri grid araştyrmasy we geçişleşimik bilen optimizləndi. Sınıftalaryň netijesi soňky çaklama üçin ses bermek bilen birleşildi. Birnäçe görnüş üpjükler keşif edildi, wajyp saýlamak bilen iň informasiýaly tanişkodyldy. Iň gowy düzümler 1.1 we 1.2 diňe ýetdi F1 sanlary 47.4% we 66.0% ilişkiler arasynda. Seresasy tanamak we klasifikasy 2-nji süýtgede bolan üçin bu synagy 33.9% we 17.0% süýtgede ýetdi.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت NTNU را به تابع ۷ نیم Eval-2018 در مورد شناسایی و برقراری ارتباط نشان می دهد. وزن کلاس و پارامترهای پنج گروهبان متفاوت تحت نظارت بررسی از طریق جستجوی شبکه و تحقیق متفاوت بهترین شدند. نتیجه\u200cهای مخفیانه\u200cها از طریق رای برای پیش\u200cبینی نهایی ترکیب شده\u200cاند. یک مختلف ویژگی گسترده کشف شد، با بیشترین اطلاعاتی که توسط انتخاب ویژگی شناسایی شده بود. بهترین تنظیمات درجه ۱.۱ و ۱.۲ امتیاز F1 را به دست آورد. برای شناسایی و برقراری ارتباط در زیر سوال ۲، امتیاز F1 از 33.9% و 17.0%،', 'af': "Die papier stel NTNU se bydraag aan SemEval-2018 taak 7 oor verwanting identifikasie en klasifikasie voor. Die klasweegte en parameters van vyf alternatiewe ondersoekte klassifiseerders was optimaliseer deur rooster soek en kruis- valiseer. Die uitvoerdes van die klassifiseerders was gekombineer deur die stem vir die eindelike voorskou. 'n Wyde verskillende eienskappe is uitgesoek, met die mees informatiewe geïdentifiseer deur funksiekeuse. Die beste opstelling het F1 telling van 47. 4% en 66. 0% in die verwanting klasifikasie ondersteun 1. 1 en 1. 2. Vir verwanting identifikasie en klasifikasie in Subask 2, het dit F1 telling van 33.9% en 17.0%,", 'sq': 'Gazeta paraqet kontributin e NTNU në SemEval-2018 Task 7 mbi identifikimin dhe klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve. Peshat e klasës dhe parametrat e pesë klasifikuesve alternativë të mbikqyrur u optimizuan nëpërmjet kërkimit të rrjetit dhe kryqëzimit. Rezultatet e klasifikuesve u kombinuan nëpërmjet votimit për parashikimin përfundimtar. U eksploruan një shumëllojshmëri të gjerë karakteristikësh, me më informacive të identifikuara nga zgjedhja e karakteristikëve. Vendimi më i mirë arriti rezultatet F1 prej 47.4% dhe 66.0% në klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve nëndetyra 1.1 dhe 1.2. Për identifikimin e marrëdhënieve dhe klasifikimin në nënpyetjen 2, ajo arriti rezultate F1 prej 33.9% dhe 17.0%,', 'am': 'የጋዜጠው ግንኙነት ማግኘት እና መግለጫ ላይ የNTNU የስራ ስራ 7 አቀረበ፡፡ በጭብጥ ላይ ሚዛን እና በተለየ አምስት ምርጫዎች ክፍሎች በgrid search and cross-validation የተሻሉ ናቸው፡፡ የደረጃ ውጤቶች የመጨረሻው ትንቢት በመምረጥ የተሰበሰቡ ናቸው፡፡ በአስተናክል ምርጫ የተገኘው የፊደል መረጃዎች በተለየ ብዙ ምርጫዎች ተከታተሉ፡፡ The best setting achieved F1 scores of 47.4% and 66.0% in the relation classification subtasks 1.1 and 1.2.  አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের প্রতি এনটিএনইউ এর অবদান উপস্থাপন করেছে যে সম্পর্কের পরিচিতি এবং বিভাগের ব্যাপারে ৭ গ্রিড অনুসন্ধান এবং ক্রাস-বৈধ অনুমোদনের মাধ্যমে পাঁচটি বিকল্প পরিমাপ এবং পরিমাপ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। শেষ ভবিষ্যতের মাধ্যমে ভোট দিয়ে ক্লাশিফারদের আউটপুট একত্রিত হয়েছে। বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য সনাক্ত করা হয়েছে, বৈশিষ্ট্য নির্বাচনের দ্বারা সবচেয়ে তথ্য চিহ্নিত হয়েছে। সেরা বৈশিষ্ট্য ১. ১ এবং ১. ২ সাবটিক্যাশনের সাবটাকাজে ৪৭. ৪% এবং ৬৬. ২য় সাবটাসে সম্পর্কের পরিচিতি এবং পরিচিতির জন্য এটি এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে ৩৩. ৯% এবং ১৭.', 'az': "Kağıt NTNU'nun SemEval-2018 Task 7 ilə ilişkilərin kimlik və klasifikasyonu barəsindəki qismətini göstərir. Beş alternatif təhlükəsizli klasifikatçıların dərəcə ağırlığı və parametrləri ağır arama və çoxlu təsdiqləmə vasitəsilə optimizləndi. Klasifikatların çıxışları son tədbir üçün səslə birləşdirildi. Bütün müxtəlif fəaliyyətlər keşfetildi, fəaliyyətlərin seçimləri ilə ən çox informativ kimi keşfetildi. Ən yaxşı tərzdə F1 nöqtəsi 47,4% və 66,0% ilişkil klasifikasyonunda 1.1 və 1.2 dəyişdirildi. İkinci dəyişiklik təsdiqlənməsi və klasifikasiya üçün F1 dəyişiklikləri 33,9 % və 17,0 % oldu,", 'hy': 'Այս թուղթը ներկայացնում է ՆԹՆ-ի ներդրումը ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի 7-ի հանձնարարության համար հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերման և դասակարգումների մասին: Հինգ այլընտրանքային վերահսկված դասակարգիչների դասակարգի կշիռները և պարամետրերը օպտիմացվեցին ցանցի որոնման և խաչը ստուգելու միջոցով: Դասավորողների արդյունքները միավորվել էին վերջնական կանխատեսման համար քվեարկելու միջոցով: Հետազոտեցին տարբեր հատկանիշներ, որոնք ամենատեղեկատվական հատկանիշների ընտրության միջոցով են հայտնաբերվել: Լավագույն համակարգը հասավ F1 գնահատականների 47.4 և 66.0 տոկոսի հարաբերության դասակարգման 1.1 և 1.2 ենթախնդիրներում: Հաբերության հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման համար 2-րդ ենթահարցում այն հասավ F1-ի 33.9 և 17.0 տոկոսների,', 'bs': 'U novinama se predstavlja doprinos NTNU-a u zadatak 7 za semiEval-2018 o identifikaciji i klasifikaciji odnosa. Težina klase i parametri pet alternativnih nadzornih klasifikatora su optimizirani kroz pretraživanje mreže i cross-validatiranje. Rezultati klasifikatora su kombinirani glasanjem za konačnu predviđanje. Istraživano je široko raznolikovanje karakteristika, sa najinformativnijim identificiranjem izbora karakteristika. Najbolji nastav postigao je rezultate F1 od 47,4% i 66,0% u odnosu na klasifikaciju podataka 1,1 i 1,2. Za identifikaciju i klasifikaciju odnosa u podpitanju 2, ostvarila je rezultate F1 od 33,9% i 17,0%,', 'ca': 'El paper presenta la contribució de la NTNU a la tasca 7 SemEval-2018 sobre identificació i classificació de relacions. Els pes i paràmetres de classe de cinc classificadors alternativs supervisats van ser optimitzats a través de la cerca de xarxa i la validació cruzada. Els resultats dels classificadors van ser combinats votant per la predicció final. Es van explorar una gran varietat de característiques, amb la més informativa identificada per selecció de característiques. The best setting achieved F1 scores of 47.4% and 66.0% in the relation classification subtasks 1.1 and 1.2.  Per identificar la relació i classificar la subterrània 2, va aconseguir puntuacions F1 del 33,9% i del 17,0%,', 'cs': 'Článek představuje příspěvek NTNU k SemEval-2018 Task 7 na identifikaci a klasifikaci vztahů. Třídní váhy a parametry pěti alternativních dohledovaných klasifikátorů byly optimalizovány pomocí vyhledávání mřížky a křížové validace. Výstupy klasifikátorů byly kombinovány hlasováním pro konečnou predikci. Byla prozkoumána široká škála funkcí, přičemž ty nejinformativnější byly identifikovány výběrem funkcí. Nejlepší nastavení dosáhlo F1 skóre 47,4% a 66,0% ve vztahu klasifikace dílčích úkolů 1.1 a 1.2. Pro identifikaci vztahů a klasifikaci v podúkolu 2 dosáhla F1 skóre 33,9% a 17,0%,', 'et': 'Töös tutvustatakse NTNU panust SemEval-2018 ülesandesse 7 seoste identifitseerimise ja klassifitseerimise kohta. Viie alternatiivse järelevalvega klassifitseerija kaalud ja parameetrid optimeeriti võrguotsingu ja ristvalideerimise kaudu. Klassifikaatorite väljundid kombineeriti hääletades lõpliku prognoosi poolt. Uuriti mitmesuguseid funktsioone, kõige informatiivsemad funktsioonide valiku põhjal. Parim seade saavutas F1 punktid 47,4% ja 66,0% seose klassifikatsiooni alaülesannetes 1.1 ja 1.2. Seose kindlakstegemiseks ja klassifitseerimiseks alaülesandes 2 saavutas see F1 skoorid 33,9% ja 17,0%,', 'fi': 'Työssä esitellään NTNU:n panos SemEval-2018 Tehtävään 7, joka koskee suhdetunnistamista ja luokittelua. Viiden vaihtoehtoisen valvotun luokittelijan luokkapainot ja parametrit optimoitiin ruudukkohaulla ja ristivalidoinnilla. Luokittajien tuotokset yhdistettiin äänestämällä lopullisesta ennusteesta. Tutkimuksessa tutkittiin monenlaisia ominaisuuksia, joista informatiivisimmat tunnistettiin ominaisuuksien valinnalla. Paras asetus saavutti F1-pisteet 47,4% ja 66,0% suhdeluokituksen alatehtävissä 1.1 ja 1.2. Suhteen tunnistamisessa ja luokittelussa alatehtävään 2 se saavutti F1-pisteet 33,9% ja 17,0%.', 'ha': "Kanarin na bãyar da shirin NTNU zuwa SemEV-2018 Tafiyar 7 kan shaidar da kuma fassara. Ana amfani da nau'i da parameters wa nau'in fasa shan nau'i da aka canza fasalar da aka tsare su a baka-search na shirin mai maras-inganci. Ana haɗa matsala na dangani da za'a saurãre wa gabanin ƙarshe. A wide variety of features were explored, with the most informative identified by feature selection.  Babbar daidaita ta sami F1 score 47.4% da 66.0% cikin taskõkin bincike 1.1 da 1.2. Ga bayan shaidar masu husũma da fassarar cikin aikin 2, ya sãmu F1 score na 33.9% da 17.0%,", 'jv': 'Gambar nggawe barang nggawe NNU tarjamahan kanggo seminval-2013 task 7 nggawe barang urip nggawe isine aplikasi lan nggo kelas. Global email-custom-header-Security string" in "context_BAR_string Display boxes kanggo langkung sampeyan karo kelas pangrungu 2, iki wis asèhmu F1 kalih basa 3.9% lan 16.0%,', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen prispevek NTNU k nalogi SemEval-2018 7 o identifikaciji in klasifikaciji povezav. Uteži razredov in parametri petih alternativnih nadzorovanih klasifikatorjev smo optimizirali z iskanjem mreže in navzkrižno validacijo. Rezultati klasifikatorjev so bili združeni z glasovanjem za končno napoved. Raziskali so široko paleto značilnosti, najbolj informativne pa so bile opredeljene z izbiro značilnosti. Najboljša nastavitev je dosegla rezultate F1 47,4% in 66,0% v razmerju klasifikacije podnalog 1.1 in 1.2. Za identifikacijo relacij in razvrstitev v podnalogo 2 je dosegla rezultate F1 33,9% in 17,0%,', 'he': "The paper presents NTNU's contribution to SemEval-2018 Task 7 on relation identification and classification.  משקלי הכיתה ופרמטרים של חמישה מסמכים אלטרנטיביים ששומרים על השגחה הופכו לאופטימיזם באמצעות חיפוש רשת ואישור צלב. התוצאות של המקלסיפים היו משולבות דרך הצבעה לחזוי הסופי. מגוון רחב של תכונות נחקרו, עם המידע ביותר מזהה על ידי בחירת תכונות. הסדרה הטובה ביותר השיגה נקודות F1 של 47.4% ו-66.0% בסדרת היחסים עבור זיהוי מערכת יחסים והקליפורה בתא 2, הוא השיג נקודות F1 של 33.9% ו-17.0%,", 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་དེ་ནི་NTNU's contribution to SemEval-2018 Task 7 on relation to identification and classification. The class weights and parameters of five alternative supervised classifiers were optimized through grid search and cross-validation. དབྱེ་བཟོས་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དག་གི་གྲངས་རྣམས་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་རྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གྲངས་བསྡུར་བ་རེད། A wide variety of features were explored, with the most informative identified by feature selection. The best setting achieved F1 scores of 47.4% and 66.0% in the relation to classification subtasks 1.1 and 1.2. འབྲེལ་བ་འདི་གསལ་བཤད་དང་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་ཚབ་གཉིས་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་དང་མཐུན་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཨང་གྲངས་༡༣.༩% དང་། ༡༧.༠%"}
{'en': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7 : Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ar': 'تالا في SemEval-2018 المهمة 7: تحسين الخسارة الهجينة لتصنيف العلاقة باستخدام الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية', 'es': 'Talla en SemEval-2018 Tarea 7: Optimización de pérdidas híbridas para la clasificación de relaciones mediante redes neuronales convolucionales', 'pt': 'Talla no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 7: Otimização de Perdas Híbridas para Classificação de Relações usando Redes Neurais Convolucionais', 'fr': "Talla au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 7\xa0: Optimisation des pertes hybrides pour la classification des relations à l'aide de réseaux de neurones convolutifs", 'zh': 'Talla在SemEval-2018务7:用卷积神经网络之类优化', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 7 पर Talla: Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए हाइब्रिड हानि अनुकूलन', 'ja': 'Talla at SemEval -2018タスク7 ：畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用した関係分類のハイブリッド損失最適化', 'ru': 'Талла на SemEval-2018 Задача 7: Оптимизация гибридных потерь для классификации отношений с использованием сверточных нейронных сетей', 'ga': 'Talla ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 7: Optamú Caillteanas Hibrid le haghaidh Aicmiú Caidrimh ag úsáid Líonraí Néaracha Convolutional', 'ka': 'ტალა semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 7: ჰიბრიდის დასრულება პორტიმიზაციის კლასიფიკაციის გამოყენება კონგულური ნეიროლური ქსელების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Talla a SemEval-2018 7. feladat: Hibrid veszteség optimalizálása a kapcsolatok besorolásához konvolúciós neurális hálózatok használatával', 'el': 'Καθήκον 7: Βελτιστοποίηση υβριδικών απωλειών για ταξινόμηση σχέσεων με τη χρήση κυριλωδών νευρωνικών δικτύων', 'lt': '7 užduotis: hibridinių nuostolių optimizavimas santykių klasifikavimui naudojant konvolucinius nervinius tinklus', 'it': 'Talla al SemEval-2018 Task 7: Ottimizzazione della perdita ibrida per la classificazione delle relazioni utilizzando reti neurali convoluzionali', 'ms': 'Tinggi pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Optimisasi Kehilangan Hybrid untuk Klasifikasi Hubungan menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional', 'kk': 'Талла 7 тапсырмасы: Хибрид қатынас классификациясының оптимизациясы қатынас классификациясының қатынасы', 'mk': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 7: ഹൈബ്രിഡ് നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട ഓപ്റ്റിമേഷന്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വി', 'mt': 'Għoli f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 7: Optimizzazzjoni tat-Telf ibridu għall-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet bl-użu ta’ Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali', 'ro': 'Talla la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 7: Optimizarea pierderilor hibride pentru clasificarea relațiilor folosind rețelele neuronale convoluționale', 'pl': 'Talla w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 7: Optymalizacja strat hybrydowych dla klasyfikacji relacji przy użyciu konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych', 'mn': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relations Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'no': 'Talla at semiEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'sr': 'Talla na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: Hibridni gubitak optimizacija za klasifikaciju odnosa koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'sv': 'Talla på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 7: Optimering av hybridförluster för relationsklassificering med hjälp av konvulutionella neurala nätverk', 'si': 'Talla at semeval-2018 Job 7: hybrid Loss Optimization for Association Classication', 'so': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolution Neural Network', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 7 میں طالا: ہیبراڈ گم ہونے کے لئے رابطہ کلاسیفی کے مطابق کائنال نیورال نیٹورک کے مطابق', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Số ở Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 7: Cách Cách tô hóa độ thua người lai cho phân nhánh liên quan bằng mạng thần kinh có liên hệ', 'hr': 'Talla na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: optimizacija gubitka za klasifikaciju odnosa koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'da': 'Talla på SemEval-2018 Opgave 7: Optimering af hybridtab til relationsklassificering ved hjælp af konvulutionsneurale netværk', 'nl': 'Talla bij SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Hybride Verliesoptimalisatie voor Relatieclassificatie met behulp van Convolutionele Neurale Netwerken', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Оптимизиране на хибридната загуба за класификация на отношенията чрез конвелуционни неврални мрежи', 'fa': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relations Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'de': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 7: Hybride Verlustoptimierung zur Beziehungsklassifikation mit Hilfe von Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ko': 'Talla가 SemEval-18 작업 7: 권적신경 네트워크를 사용하여 관계 분류를 하는 혼합 손실 최적화', 'id': 'Tinggi di SemEval-2018 Tugas 7: Optimisasi Hibrid Loss for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'af': 'Talla by SemEval-2018 Taak 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'tr': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'sw': 'Talla kwenye SemEval-2018 Task 7: Kushindwa Kushindwa kwa Kuhusiana na Kuhusiana', 'sq': 'Talla në SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'am': 'ስራ 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Network', 'hy': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'az': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relations Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ca': 'Talla a SemEval-2018 Task 7: Optimisation of Hybrid Loss for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'et': 'Talla SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 7: Hübriidkadude optimeerimine seoste klassifitseerimiseks konvolutsioonivõrkude abil', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৭: কনভোলেশনের নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে হাইব্রিড হারিয়ে যাওয়ার অপটিমেশন', 'fi': 'Talla SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 7: Hybridi Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'bs': 'Talla na semiEval-2018 zadatku 7: Hibridni gubitak optimizacije za klasifikaciju odnosa koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'cs': 'Úkol 7: Optimalizace hybridních ztrát pro klasifikaci vztahů pomocí konvelučních neuronových sítí', 'ha': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'he': 'הגובה ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 7: אופטימיזציה איבוד היברידי לקlassifika יחסים באמצעות רשתות נוירוליות משתנות', 'sk': 'Talla na SemEval-2018 Naloga 7: Optimizacija hibridnih izgub za klasifikacijo relacij z uporabo konvolucijskih živčnih omrežij', 'bo': 'Talla at SemEval-2018 Task 7: Hybrid Loss Optimization for Relation Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'jv': 'Tula at seminval-2008 task 7: HyBridge lose Optimisation for Rel CLSSification use convolution Neral networks'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 7   given an entity-tagged text from the ACL Anthology corpus, identify and classify pairs of entities that have one of six possible semantic relationships. Our model consists of a convolutional neural network leveraging pre-trained word embeddings, unlabeled ACL-abstracts, and multiple window sizes to automatically learn useful features from entity-tagged sentences. We also experiment with a hybrid loss function, a combination of cross-entropy loss and ranking loss, to boost the separation in classification scores. Lastly, we include WordNet-based features to further improve the performance of our model. Our best model achieves an F1(macro) score of 74.2 and 84.8 on subtasks 1.1 and 1.2, respectively.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نهجنا في SemEval-2018 Task 7 - بالنظر إلى نص تم وضع علامة كيان عليه من مجموعة مختارات ACL ، حدد وصنف أزواج الكيانات التي لها واحدة من ست علاقات دلالية محتملة. يتكون نموذجنا من شبكة عصبية تلافيفية تستفيد من عمليات دمج الكلمات المدربة مسبقًا ، وملخصات ACL غير المسماة ، وأحجام نوافذ متعددة لتعلم ميزات مفيدة تلقائيًا من الجمل ذات علامات الكيان. نجرب أيضًا وظيفة الخسارة الهجينة ، وهي مزيج من فقدان الانتروبيا المتقاطعة وفقدان الترتيب ، لتعزيز الفصل في درجات التصنيف. أخيرًا ، نقوم بتضمين الميزات المستندة إلى WordNet لتحسين أداء نموذجنا بشكل أكبر. يحقق أفضل نموذج لدينا درجة F1 (ماكرو) تبلغ 74.2 و 84.8 في المهام الفرعية 1.1 و 1.2 ، على التوالي.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa abordagem para a Tarefa 7 do SemEval-2018 – dado um texto com tag de entidade do corpus ACL Anthology, identificar e classificar pares de entidades que tenham um dos seis relacionamentos semânticos possíveis. Nosso modelo consiste em uma rede neural convolucional que aproveita incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas, resumos de ACL não rotulados e vários tamanhos de janela para aprender automaticamente recursos úteis de frases com tags de entidade. Também experimentamos uma função de perda híbrida, uma combinação de perda de entropia cruzada e perda de classificação, para aumentar a separação nas pontuações de classificação. Por fim, incluímos recursos baseados em WordNet para melhorar ainda mais o desempenho do nosso modelo. Nosso melhor modelo atinge uma pontuação F1(macro) de 74,2 e 84,8 nas subtarefas 1,1 e 1,2, respectivamente.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro enfoque de la Tarea 7 de SemEval-2018: dado un texto etiquetado con entidad del corpus de ACL Anthology, identificar y clasificar pares de entidades que tienen una de las seis posibles relaciones semánticas. Nuestro modelo consiste en una red neuronal convolucional que aprovecha incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas, resúmenes de ACL sin etiqueta y múltiples tamaños de ventana para aprender automáticamente características útiles de oraciones etiquetadas con entidades. También experimentamos con una función de pérdida híbrida, una combinación de pérdida de entropía cruzada y pérdida de clasificación, para aumentar la separación en los puntajes de clasificación. Por último, incluimos funciones basadas en WordNet para mejorar aún más el rendimiento de nuestro modelo. Nuestro mejor modelo logra una puntuación F1 (macro) de 74.2 y 84.8 en las subtareas 1.1 y 1.2, respectivamente.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre approche de la tâche 7 de SEMEVAL-2018\xa0: à partir d'un texte étiqueté d'entité du corpus ACL Anthology, identifier et classer des paires d'entités ayant l'une des six relations sémantiques possibles. Notre modèle se compose d'un réseau neuronal convolutif exploitant des intégrations de mots pré-entraînées, des résumés ACL non étiquetés et des tailles de fenêtres multiples pour apprendre automatiquement des fonctionnalités utiles à partir de phrases marquées par des entités. Nous expérimentons également une fonction de perte hybride, une combinaison de perte d'entropie croisée et de perte de classement, pour augmenter la séparation dans les scores de classification. Enfin, nous incluons des fonctionnalités basées sur WordNet afin d'améliorer encore les performances de notre modèle. Notre meilleur modèle obtient un score F1 (macro) de 74,2 et 84,8 sur les sous-tâches 1.1 et 1.2, respectivement.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018タスク7への私たちのアプローチについて説明します。ACL Anthologyコーパスのエンティティタグ付きテキストを使用して、6つの可能な意味関係のうちの1つを持つエンティティのペアを特定し、分類します。当社のモデルは、事前にトレーニングされた単語の埋め込み、ラベル付けされていないACL抽象化、および複数のウィンドウサイズを活用して、エンティティタグ付きの文章から有用な機能を自動的に学習する畳み込みニューラルネットワークで構成されています。また、クロスエントロピー損失とランキング損失の組み合わせであるハイブリッド損失関数を実験し、分類スコアの分離を促進した。最後に、モデルのパフォーマンスをさらに向上させるためにWordNetベースの機能を含めます。当社のベストモデルは、サブタスク1.1と1.2でそれぞれ74.2と84.8のF 1 （マクロ）スコアを達成しています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 टास्क 7 के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है - एसीएल एंथोलॉजी कॉर्पस से एक इकाई-टैग किए गए पाठ को देखते हुए, उन संस्थाओं के जोड़े की पहचान और वर्गीकरण करता है जिनके पास छह संभावित शब्दार्थ संबंधों में से एक है। हमारे मॉडल में एक convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग, अनलेबल एसीएल-सार, और कई विंडो आकारों का लाभ उठाते हुए स्वचालित रूप से इकाई-टैग किए गए वाक्यों से उपयोगी सुविधाओं को सीखने के लिए होता है। हम एक हाइब्रिड हानि समारोह के साथ भी प्रयोग करते हैं, वर्गीकरण स्कोर में अलगाव को बढ़ावा देने के लिए क्रॉस-एन्ट्रॉपी हानि और रैंकिंग हानि का एक संयोजन। अंत में, हम अपने मॉडल के प्रदर्शन को और बेहतर बनाने के लिए WordNet-आधारित सुविधाओं को शामिल करते हैं। हमारा सबसे अच्छा मॉडल क्रमशः 1.1 और 1.2 उप-कार्यों पर 74.2 और 84.8 का F1 (मैक्रो) स्कोर प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2018务7之法 - 给定自ACL Anthology语料库实体标文本,识类有六语义之一也。 凡我一卷积神经网络,网络以先训之词嵌、未识之ACL摘要,大小以自效于实体之句。 试之以合损函数,交熵以合名,以重分离。 终于包 WordNet 之功,以进一步提高模形之性。 吾曹最佳 1.1 与 1.2 分得 74.2 84.8 F1(宏观)分数。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наш подход к задаче 7 SemEval-2018 – учитывая текст с меткой сущности из корпуса Антологии ACL, идентифицируйте и классифицируйте пары сущностей, которые имеют одну из шести возможных семантических связей. Наша модель состоит из сверточной нейронной сети, использующей предварительно обученные вложения слов, немеченные рефераты ACL и несколько размеров окон для автоматического изучения полезных функций из предложений с тегами сущностей. Мы также экспериментируем с гибридной функцией потерь, комбинацией потерь при перекрестной энтропии и потерь при ранжировании, чтобы увеличить разделение в классификационных баллах. Наконец, мы включаем функции на базе WordNet для дальнейшего повышения производительности нашей модели. Наша лучшая модель достигает F1(макро) балла 74,2 и 84,8 в подзадачах 1,1 и 1,2 соответственно.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcur chuige i leith Tasc 7 SemEval-2018 – má chuirtear téacs clibeáilte aonáin ó chorpas Anthology ACL ar fáil, sainaithin agus rangaigh péirí eintiteas a bhfuil ceann amháin de shé chaidreamh shéimeantacha féideartha acu. Is éard atá inár múnla ná líonra néarúil comhbheartaithe a ghiaráil leabú focal réamhoilte, coimrithe ACL neamhlipéadaithe, agus ilmhéideanna fuinneoige chun gnéithe úsáideacha a fhoghlaim go huathoibríoch ó abairtí a bhfuil clib aonán orthu. Déanaimid tástáil freisin le feidhm chaillteanais hibrideach, meascán de chaillteanas tras-eantrópachta agus caillteanas rangú, chun an deighilt i scóir aicmithe a threisiú. Ar deireadh, cuirimid gnéithe WordNet san áireamh chun feidhmíocht ár múnla a fheabhsú tuilleadh. Baineann ár múnla is fearr amach scór F1 (macra) de 74.2 agus 84.8 ar fhothasc 1.1 agus 1.2, faoi seach.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την προσέγγισή μας στην εργασία 7.δεδομένου ενός κειμένου με ετικέτα οντότητας από το σώμα Ανθολογίας εντοπίζει και ταξινομεί ζεύγη οντοτήτων που έχουν μία από τις έξι πιθανές σημασιολογικές σχέσεις. Το μοντέλο μας αποτελείται από ένα σύνθετο νευρωνικό δίκτυο που χρησιμοποιεί προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων, αφηρημένες αφηγήσεις και πολλαπλά μεγέθη παραθύρων για να μάθει αυτόματα χρήσιμα χαρακτηριστικά από προτάσεις με ετικέτα οντότητας. Επίσης πειραματιζόμαστε με μια υβριδική λειτουργία απώλειας, έναν συνδυασμό απώλειας διασταυρούμενης εντροπίας και απώλειας κατάταξης, για να ενισχύσουμε τον διαχωρισμό στις βαθμολογίες ταξινόμησης. Τέλος, συμπεριλαμβάνουμε χαρακτηριστικά που βασίζονται στο για να βελτιώσουμε περαιτέρω την απόδοση του μοντέλου μας. Το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει βαθμολογία 74.2 και 84.8 στις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες 1.1 και 1.2 αντίστοιχα.', 'ka': 'ამ წიგნის ჩვენი პროგრამა SemEval-2018 დავალების 7 წიგნის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ACL ანტოლოგიის კორპოსდან განსაზღვრებული ტექსტის შესაძლებელია, განსაზღვრება და კლასიფიკაცია ორი ინტერტიკების ერთი შესაძლებელი შ ჩვენი მოდელი არის კონტუროლური ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც წინ შესწავლობული სიტყვები, არაფერი ACL- აბსტრაკტები და მრავალური ფანჯრის ზომის, რომ ავტომატურად ისწავლოთ საჭირო ფუნ ჩვენ ასევე ექსპერიმენტირებით ჰიბრიდის შემდგომარების ფუნქცია, კრონტეპოფიის შემდგომარებით და წერტილების შემდგომარებით, რომ კლასიფიკაციის წერტილებში გაყო საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ WordNet-დაბათებული ფუნქციები ჩვენი მოდელის მუშაობას უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მუშაობით. ჩვენი საუკეთესო მოდელი მიიღება F1(მაკრო) წერტილი 74.2 და 84.8 წერტილის შესახებ 1.1 და 1.2 წერტილი.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive il nostro approccio al SemEval-2018 Task 7 - dato un testo con tag entità dal corpus ACL Anthology, identificare e classificare coppie di entità che hanno una delle sei possibili relazioni semantiche. Il nostro modello consiste in una rete neurale convoluzionale che sfrutta incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate, abstract ACL non etichettati e più dimensioni di finestre per imparare automaticamente funzioni utili dalle frasi con tag entità. Sperimentiamo anche una funzione di perdita ibrida, una combinazione di perdita di entropia incrociata e perdita di classifica, per aumentare la separazione nei punteggi di classificazione. Infine, includiamo funzionalità basate su WordNet per migliorare ulteriormente le prestazioni del nostro modello. Il nostro modello migliore raggiunge un punteggio F1 (macro) di 74,2 e 84,8 sulle sottoattività 1.1 e 1.2, rispettivamente.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 Task 7 megközelítését - az ACL Anthology korpuszból származó entitáscímkézett szöveg alapján - azonosítja és osztályozza azokat az entitásokat, amelyek hat lehetséges szemantikai kapcsolat egyikével rendelkeznek. Modellünk egy konvuluációs neurális hálózatból áll, amely előre képzett szóbeágyazásokat, címke nélküli ACL-absztraktokat és több ablakméretet használ, hogy automatikusan megtanulják a hasznos funkciókat entitással címkézett mondatokból. Kísérletezünk egy hibrid veszteség funkcióval is, a kereszt-entrópia veszteség és a rangsorolási veszteség kombinációjával, hogy fokozzuk az osztályozási pontszámok szétválasztását. Végezetül WordNet alapú funkciókat is tartalmazunk modellünk teljesítményének további javítása érdekében. Legjobb modellünk 74,2 és 84,8 F1 (makro) pontszámot ér el az 1.1 és 1.2 altfeladatokban.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува нашиот пристап до SemEval-2018 задача 7 - со текст означен со ентитет од ACL антологискиот корпус, идентификува и класификува парови ентитети кои имаат еден од шест можни семантични односи. Нашиот модел се состои од конволуционална нервна мрежа која користи предобучени зборови вградени, необележани ACL-апстракти и повеќе големини на прозорци за автоматски да се научат корисни карактеристики од реченици обележани со ентитет. Исто така, експериментираме со функција на хибридна загуба, комбинација на загуба на крстоентропија и загуба на рангирање, за да ја зголемиме разделувањето во оценките на класификацијата. Lastly, we include WordNet-based features to further improve the performance of our model.  Our best model achieves an F1(macro) score of 74.2 and 84.8 on subtasks 1.1 and 1.2, respectively.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің жарым-2018 7 тапсырмасына қатынасызды таңдайды - ACL антологиялық корпустағы нысандарды белгілеген мәтін, алты мүмкін семантикалық қатынас бар нысандардың екеуін анықтап, классификациялау. Біздің үлгіміз бірнеше невралдық желінің көмегімен алдын- талап етілген сөздерді ендіру, жазылмаған ACL- абстрактары және бірнеше терезе өлшемі, бірлікті сөздерден автоматты түрде пайдалы мүмкіндіктерді үй Біз сондай-ақ гибрид жоғалу функциясы, ентропиялық жоғалуы және жоғалуының біріктіріміз, секреттеу нөмірлерінде бөлігін көтеру үшін. Соңында, WordNet-негіздегі мүмкіндіктерімізді үлгілерімізді жақсарту үшін қолданамыз. Біздің ең жақсы моделіміз 1,1 және 1,2 суреттерінде 74,2 және 84,8 деген F1( макро) нәтижесін жеткізеді.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-approċċ tagħna għal SemEval-2018 Task 7 - meta jingħata test bit-tikketta tal-entità mill-ACL Anthology corpus, jidentifika u jikklassifika par ta’ entitajiet li għandhom waħda minn sitt relazzjonijiet semantiċi possibbli. Il-mudell tagħna jikkonsisti f’netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali li jiġġenera l-ingranaġġ ta’ kliem imħarreġ minn qabel, astratti ACL mhux immarkati, u daqsijiet multipli ta’ twieqi biex jitgħallmu awtomatikament karatteristiċi utli minn sentenzi bit-tikketta tal-entità. Nisperimentaw ukoll b’funzjoni ta’ telf ibridu, taħlita ta’ telf ta’ entropija trasversali u telf ta’ klassifikazzjoni, biex isaħħu s-separazzjoni fil-punteġġi tal-klassifikazzjoni. Fl-aħħar nett, ninkludu karatteristiċi bbażati fuq WordNet biex itejbu aktar il-prestazzjoni tal-mudell tagħna. L-aħjar mudell tagħna jilħaq punteġġ F1(makro) ta’ 74.2 u 84.8 fuq sottomistoqsijiet 1.1 u 1.2 rispettivament.', 'lt': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 7 - given an entity-tagged text from the ACL Anthology corpus, identify and classify pairs of entities that have one of six possible semantic relationships.  Mūsų model į sudaro konvoliucinis nervinis tinklas, kuriame naudojamas iš anksto parengtas žodžių įdėjimas, nenustatytos AKL abstrakcijos ir kelių langų dydžiai, kad būtų galima automatiškai išmokti naudingų savybių iš subjektu pažymėtų sakinių. We also experiment with a hybrid loss function, a combination of cross-entropy loss and ranking loss, to boost the separation in classification scores.  Galiausiai mes įtraukiame WordNet pagrindu grindžiamas savybes, kad toliau pagerintume mūsų modelio veiksmingumą. Mūsų geriausias modelis pasiekia F1(makro) rezultatą atitinkamai 74,2 ir 84,8 paklausose 1.1 ir 1.2.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2018 Task 7-ийн аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. ACL Антологийн корпус-аас нэг нэг бүлгийн загвар тайлбарлаж, 6 боломжтой semantic холбоотой хоёр бүлгүүдийг тодорхойлох боломжтой. Бидний загвар нь мэдрэлийн тархины сүлжээнд сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэлбэрүүдийг автоматжуулахын тулд олон цонхны хэмжээсүүд юм. Бид мөн гибрид алдагдах функцийг туршиж, эсрэг энтропийн алдагдлын холбоотой, дарааллын алдагдлын холбоотой, хуваагдах тоонуудыг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд туршиж байна. Эцэст нь бид WordNet-ийн загварын үйл ажиллагааг илүү сайжруулахын тулд нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бидний хамгийн сайн загвар нь 1.1, 1.2 доор 74.2 болон 84.8 тооны F1(макро) оноо гаргадаг.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan kita ke SemEval-2018 Tugas 7 - diberikan teks entity-tagged dari ACL Anthology corpus, mengenalpasti dan mengklasifikasikan pasangan entiti yang mempunyai salah satu daripada enam hubungan semantik yang mungkin. Model kami terdiri dari rangkaian saraf konvolusi menggunakan bengkok perkataan terlatih-terlatih, abstrak-ACL tidak berlebihan, dan saiz tetingkap berbilang untuk secara automatik belajar ciri-ciri berguna dari kalimat-entity-tagged. Kami juga eksperimen dengan fungsi kehilangan hibrid, kombinasi kehilangan entropi salib dan kehilangan rangkaian, untuk meningkatkan pemisahan dalam skor klasifikasi. Lastly, we include WordNet-based features to further improve the performance of our model.  Our best model achieves an F1(macro) score of 74.2 and 84.8 on subtasks 1.1 and 1.2, respectively.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie abordarea noastră la SemEval-2018 Task 7 - dată fiind un text etichetat cu entitate din corpul Anthology ACL, identificăm și clasificăm perechile de entități care au una dintre cele șase posibile relații semantice. Modelul nostru constă dintr-o rețea neuronală convoluțională care utilizează încorporări de cuvinte pre-instruite, abstracte ACL fără etichete și dimensiuni multiple ale ferestrelor pentru a învăța automat caracteristici utile din propozițiile etichetate cu entitate. Experimentăm, de asemenea, o funcție hibridă de pierdere, o combinație de pierdere de entropie încrucișată și pierdere de rang, pentru a spori separarea în scorurile de clasificare. În cele din urmă, includem funcții bazate pe WordNet pentru a îmbunătăți în continuare performanța modelului nostru. Cel mai bun model al nostru obține un scor F1 (macro) de 74,2 și 84,8 la subactivitățile 1.1 și respectiv 1.2.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 7-ലേക്ക് നമ്മുടെ വഴിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. എസിഎല്\u200d ആന്\u200dറോളജി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്റെ ടാഗ്ഗ് ടെക് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d ഉണ്ട്, മുന്\u200dപരിശീലന വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു, അടയാളപ്പെടാത്ത ACL-abst ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡ് നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d കൊണ്ടും, ക്രിസ്റ്റോപ്പി നഷ്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഒരു കൂട്ടം പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു, ക്ലാസ്പിക്കല്\u200d സ്ക അവസാനം, നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d വാര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഞങ Our best model achieves an F1(macro) score of 74.2 and 84.8 on subtasks 1.1 and 1.2, respectively.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup zadatku 7 od semiEval-2018 - s obzirom na tekst označenog entiteta iz Anthologijskog korpusa ACL-a, identifikuje i klasifikuje par entitata koji imaju jednu od šest mogućih semantičkih odnosa. Naš model se sastoji od konvolucionalne neuralne mreže koja uključuje predobučene reèi, nepobeležene ACL-abstrakte, i višestruke veličine prozora kako bi automatski naučila korisne funkcije iz rečenica koje su označene na entiteti. Takoðe eksperimentiramo sa funkcijom gubitka hibrida, kombinacijom gubitka kroz entropiju i gubitka reda, kako bi povećali razdvajanje u klasifikacijskim rezultatima. Na kraju, uključujemo karakteristike na WordNet-u kako bi dalje poboljšali učinkovitost našeg modela. Naš najbolji model postiže rezultat F1(makro) od 74,2 i 84,8 na podatakovima 1,1 i 1,2.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasze podejście do SemEval-2018 Zadania 7,biorąc pod uwagę tekst oznaczony przez entity z korpusu antrologii ACL, identyfikuje i klasyfikuje pary podmiotów, które mają jedną z sześciu możliwych relacji semantycznych. Nasz model składa się z konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej wykorzystującej wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia słów, nieoznakowane abstrakty ACL i wiele rozmiarów okien, aby automatycznie uczyć się przydatnych funkcji ze zdań oznaczonych podmiotami. Eksperymentujemy również z hybrydową funkcją strat, kombinacją strat krzyżowych i strat rankingowych, aby zwiększyć separację w wynikach klasyfikacji. Wreszcie, zawieramy funkcje oparte na WordNet, aby jeszcze bardziej poprawić wydajność naszego modelu. Nasz najlepszy model osiąga wynik F1(makro) 74.2 i 84.8 na podzadaniach 1.1 i 1.2.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt förhållningssätt till SemEval-2018 Task 7 - med en entitetsmärkt text från ACL Anthology korpus, identifiera och klassificera par av entiteter som har en av sex möjliga semantiska relationer. Vår modell består av ett konvulutivt neuralt nätverk som utnyttjar fördefinierade ordinbäddningar, omärkta ACL-abstracts och flera fönsterstorlekar för att automatiskt lära sig användbara funktioner från entitetstaggade meningar. Vi experimenterar också med en hybrid loss funktion, en kombination av cross-entropi loss och ranking loss, för att öka separationen i klassificeringspoäng. Slutligen inkluderar vi WordNet-baserade funktioner för att ytterligare förbättra prestandan för vår modell. Vår bästa modell uppnår en F1(makro) poäng på 74,2 respektive 84,8 på delaktiviteterna 1,1 respektive 1,2.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver tilnærminga vår til oppgåva 7 for semiEval-2018 – gitt ein tekst med entitetsmerket frå ACL-Anthologiske korpus, identifiserer og klasserer par einingar som har ein av seks moglege semantiske forhold. Modellen vårt inneheld av ein konvolusjonell neuralnettverk som leverer før- trengte ordinnbygging, ubeabelte ACL- abstrakt, og fleire vindaugsstorleik for å automatisk læra nyttige funksjonar frå teikn som er markert med entitet. Vi eksperimenterer også med ein hybridtapsfunksjon, ein kombinasjon av tap av krysentropi og tap av rekningsfunksjon, for å styra skilnaden i klassifikasjonskolar. I slutten inkluderer vi WordNet-baserte funksjonar for å forbetra utviklinga av modellen vår. Det beste modellen vårt oppnår eit F1( makro) score med 74,2 og 84,8 på subtaskar 1,1 og 1,2.', 'so': "Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran qaabilaada aan u soo galno SemEval-2018 shaqo 7 - iyadoo laga helo warqad ay ka soo bandhigtay ACL Anthology, ku garan karo iyo kala duduwan labada jidh oo leh mid ka mid ah lix xiriir oo suurtagal ah. Tusaale ahaan waxaa ka mid ah shabakadda neurada oo ku qoran hadal horay loo tababaray oo aan la qorin ACL-abstracts, iyo qiyaastii daaqada kala duduwan si ay automatic uga barto faa'iido faa'iido ah oo laga barto xafiisyada dhamaadka. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku jirrabnaa dhibaato khatar ah, hal koob oo khasaaro ah oo ay ku baabba'aan iyo khasaaro kala duduwan, si aan u kordhinno iskuulka fasaxda. ugu dambeyso waxaynu ku qornaa qeybo ku saleysan WordNet si aan u sii kordhino sameynta sameynta. Tusaale ahaan ugu wanaagsan wuxuu gaadhaa koox F1(macro) oo ah 74.2 iyo 84.8 oo ku saabsan samooyinka 1.1 iyo 1.2.", 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை செம்Eval-2018 பணி 7 க்கு எங்கள் வழிமுறையை விவரிக்கிறது - ACL Anthology கூட்டிலிருந்து ஒரு பொருள் குறிக்கப்பட்ட உரையை கொடுத்து, ஆறு முடியாத சம் எங்கள் மாதிரி முன் பயிற்சி சொல்லின் உள்ளடக்கங்கள், அடையாளமில்லாத ACL- abstracts, மற்றும் பல சாளர அளவுகள் தானாகவே பயனுள்ள பண்புகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள பயன்படும் வாக்குகளிலிருந் நாம் ஒரு ஹைப்ரிட் இழப்பு செயல்பாடுடன் சோதனைப்படுத்துகிறோம், ஒரு குறுக்கு நுழைக்கும் இழப்பு மற்றும் வரிசையில் இழப்பு, வகுப கடைசியாக, வார்ட்நெட் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள குணங்களை மேலும் மாதிரியின் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த வேண்டும எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரி துணை பணிகள் 1. 1 மற்றும் 1. 2 பெருக்கும் 74. 2 மற்றும் 84. 8 புள்ளியை பெறுகிறது.', 'ur': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 7 - given an entity-tagged text from the ACL Anthology corpus, identify and classify two entities that have one of six possible semantic relationships. ہمارا موڈل ایک کنوولیوشن نیورل نیٹورک کی نسبت ہے جو پہلے تدریس کی لکھی ہوئی لکھی ہوئی لکھی ابڈینگ، ناپذیر ACL-abstracts، اور بہت سی پنڈروں کی اندازے ہیں کہ انٹیٹ ٹیگ کی لکھی ہوئی جماعت سے اپنا فائدہ اپنا ذ ہم نے ایک ہیبریڈ خسارہ فعالیت کے ساتھ بھی آزمائش کی ہے، کروس انتروپی خسارہ اور رقم خسارہ کے ساتھ، کلاسپی سٹوروں میں تقسیم کرنے کے لئے۔ بالآخر، ہم WordNet-based features include to further improve our model performance. ہمارے بہترین نمونڈل نے 74.2 اور 84.8 کے لئے 1.1 اور 1.2 کے مطابق ایک F1(مکرو) اسکور کو پہنچایا ہے.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්වේල්-2018 කාර්ය 7 - ACL ඇන්තෝලෝජික කොර්පුස් වල ඉන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙන්නේ, ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙන්න අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන අපි හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් නැති වැඩක් සමග පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ක්\u200dරිස්ටෙන්ට්\u200dරොපි නැති වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙ අන්තිමේදී, අපි WordNet-අධාරිත විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා අපේ මොඩල් එකේ වැඩිය හොඳයි. අපේ හොඳම මොඩල් එකේ F1(මැක්රෝ) ස්කෝර් එකක් ලැබෙනවා 74.2 වල 84.8 වල ස්කෝර් 1.1 වල 1.2 වල.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả phương pháp tiếp cận của chúng ta với nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 7- chỉ ra một văn bản nhãn thực thể từ Tập Đoàn Cơ Quan Âm, nhận diện và phân loại các cặp thực thể có một trong sáu mối quan hệ ngữ pháp có thể. Mô hình của chúng ta gồm một mạng lưới thần kinh rối loạn nhờ vào sự nhúng vào từ được huấn luyện trước, hỗn hợp trừu chảy, và nhiều kích cỡ cửa sổ để tự động học các tính năng hữu ích từ những câu gắn thẻ với thực thể. Chúng tôi cũng thử nghiệm với một hàm thua người lai, một kết hợp của sự thua lỗ thập thể và độ thua, để tăng cường sự phân biệt trong điểm phân hạng. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi bao gồm những tính năng dựa trên WordNet để tăng cường hiệu quả của mô hình này. Mẫu tốt nhất của chúng ta đạt được điểm số F1(Mac) của 74.2 và 84.8 trên phần phụ 1.1 và 1.2, hai.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval-2018 Vazifa 7 ga qaramadi - ACL Anthology corpusdan ma'lumot yozilgan matnni aniqlash va taqlash mumkin bo'lgan 6 suhbatdagi semantik huquqlaridagi narsalarning biri bo'lgan narsa. Bizning modelimiz birinchi taʼminlovchi so'zlar tarmoqni taʼminlovchi so'zlarni boshqarish, notoʻgʻri ACL-abstraktlar, va bir nechta oynalar oʻlchamini avtomatik qo'llangan so'zlardan foydali xususiyatlarni o'rganish uchun foydalanuvchi tarmoqda. Biz huddi hisob yo'qotgan funksiyatlarni ko'rib chiqaramiz, cross-entropning taplarini birlashtirish va chegara yo'qotkazni ko'rib chiqarishimiz mumkin. Oxirgi, biz modelimizning bajarishini koʻpaytirish uchun WordNet asosiy xususiyatlarni birlashtiramiz. Bizning eng yaxshi modelimiz boshqa vazifalar 1.1 va 1.2 bilan F1( makro) scori 74.2 va 84.8 ishlaydi.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва подхода ни към задача 7 - като се даде текст, маркиран с entiтети от корпуса на АКЛ Антология, идентифицира и класифицира двойки entiтети, които имат една от шестте възможни семантични връзки. Нашият модел се състои от конволюционна невронна мрежа, използваща предварително обучени вграждания на думи, немаркирани абстракции и няколко размера на прозореца, за да научите автоматично полезни функции от изречения, маркирани с обекти. Също така експериментираме с хибридна функция за загуба, комбинация от загуба на кръстосана ентропия и загуба на класиране, за да увеличим разделянето на класификационните резултати. И накрая, ние включваме базирани функции за допълнително подобряване на производителността на нашия модел. Най-добрият ни модел постига оценка от 74.2 и 84.8 съответно при подзадачи 1.1 и 1.2.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft onze aanpak van SemEval-2018 Taak 7.met een entiteitsgetaggde tekst uit het ACL Anthology corpus, identificeren en classificeren paren van entiteiten die een van de zes mogelijke semantische relaties hebben. Ons model bestaat uit een convolutioneel neuraal netwerk dat gebruik maakt van vooraf getrainde woordinsluitingen, niet-gelabelde ACL-abstracts en meerdere venstergroottes om automatisch nuttige functies te leren van entiteitsgetaggeerde zinnen. We experimenteren ook met een hybride loss functie, een combinatie van cross-entropieverlies en ranking loss, om de scheiding in classificatiescores te vergroten. Tot slot voegen we WordNet-gebaseerde functies toe om de prestaties van ons model verder te verbeteren. Ons beste model behaalt een F1(macro) score van 74.2 en 84.8 op respectievelijk subtaken 1.1 en 1.2.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores tilgang til SemEval-2018 Task 7 - givet en entitetsmærket tekst fra ACL Anthology korpus, identificere og klassificere par af entiteter, der har et af seks mulige semantiske relationer. Vores model består af et konvulutivt neuralt netværk, der udnytter præ-trænede ord indlejringer, ikke-mærkede ACL-abstracts og flere vinduesstørrelser til automatisk at lære nyttige funktioner fra entitetsmærkede sætninger. Vi eksperimenterer også med en hybrid tabsfunktion, en kombination af cross-entropi tab og ranking tab, for at øge adskillelsen i klassificering scores. Endelig inkluderer vi WordNet-baserede funktioner for yderligere at forbedre ydeevnen af vores model. Vores bedste model opnår en F1(makro) score på 74,2 og 84,8 på henholdsvis underopgaver 1.1 og 1.2.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup zadatku 7 za polEval-2018 - s obzirom na tekst označenog entiteta iz antihologijskog korpusa ACL-a, identificirati i klasifikirati par entitata koji imaju jednu od šest mogućih semantičkih odnosa. Naš model se sastoji od konvolucionalne neuralne mreže koja uključuje predobučene integracije riječi, neoznačene ACL-abstrakte i višestruke veličine prozora kako bi automatski naučila korisne funkcije iz rečenica označene na entiteti. Također eksperimentiramo sa funkcijom gubitka hibrida, kombinacijom gubitka krsnoentropije i gubitka reda, kako bismo povećali razdvajanje u klasifikacijskim rezultatima. Na kraju, uključujemo karakteristike na WordNetu kako bi dalje poboljšali učinkovitost našeg modela. Naš najbolji model postiže rezultat F1(makro) od 74,2 i 84,8 na podatakovima 1,1 i 1,2.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan kita ke SemEval-2018 Tugas 7 - diberikan teks entity-tagged dari ACL Anthology corpus, mengidentifikasi dan mengklasifikasi pasangan entitas yang memiliki salah satu dari enam hubungan semantis yang mungkin. Model kami terdiri dari jaringan saraf konvolusi menggunakan penerbangan kata yang terlatih sebelumnya, ACL-abstrakt tanpa label, dan ukuran berbilang jendela untuk secara otomatis belajar ciri-ciri berguna dari kalimat entity-tagged. We also experiment with a hybrid loss function, a combination of cross-entropy loss and ranking loss, to boost the separation in classification scores.  Akhirnya, kita termasuk ciri-ciri WordNet untuk meningkatkan prestasi model kita. Model terbaik kita mencapai skor F1(makro) 74.2 dan 84.8 pada subtasks 1.1 dan 1.2, respectively.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18 퀘스트 7에 대한 우리의 방법인 ACL 문집 어료 라이브러리의 실체 표기 텍스트를 정하고 6가지 가능한 의미 관계 중 하나를 가진 실체 쌍을 식별하고 분류하는 방법을 묘사한다.우리의 모델은 미리 훈련된 단어의 삽입, 표시되지 않은 ACL 요약과 여러 개의 창 크기를 이용하여 실체가 표시된 문장에서 유용한 특징을 자동으로 학습하는 권적 신경 네트워크로 구성되어 있다.우리는 또한 혼합 손실 함수(교차 엔트로피 손실과 순위 손실의 조합)를 사용하여 분류 점수의 분리도를 높이기 위해 실험을 진행했다.마지막으로, 우리는 WordNet 기반의 기능을 추가하여 우리 모델의 성능을 더욱 향상시켰다.하위 작업 1.1과 1.2의 F1(매크로) 점수는 각각 74.2와 84.8입니다.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt unseren Ansatz für SemEval-2018 Task 7.Mit einem entity-tagged Text aus dem ACL Anthology Korpus identifizieren und klassifizieren wir Paare von Entitäten, die eine von sechs möglichen semantischen Beziehungen haben. Unser Modell besteht aus einem convolutionalen neuronalen Netzwerk, das vorgetrainierte Worteinbettungen, unbeschriftete ACL-Abstracts und mehrere Fenstergrößen nutzt, um automatisch nützliche Funktionen aus Entity-getaggten Sätzen zu lernen. Wir experimentieren auch mit einer hybriden Verlustfunktion, einer Kombination aus Kreuzentropieverlust und Rankingverlust, um die Trennung in Klassifikationswerten zu verbessern. Schließlich integrieren wir WordNet-basierte Funktionen, um die Leistung unseres Modells weiter zu verbessern. Unser bestes Modell erzielt bei Teilaufgaben 1.1 und 1.2 einen F1(Makro)-Score von 74.2 und 84.8.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روش ما را به تابع شمال-۲۰۱۸ توصیف می\u200cکند، با یک متن متن به عنوان تابع\u200cشده\u200cای از شرکت آنتولوژی ACL، جفت\u200cها را شناسایی و کلاس می\u200cکند که یکی از شش رابطه\u200cهای semantic ممکن دارند. مدل ما از یک شبکه عصبی مشترک است که ابتدایی کلمات پیش آموزش داده شده، ابتدایی\u200cهای ACL بی\u200cنوشته، و اندازه\u200cهای پنجره\u200cهای چندین تا ویژه\u200cهای مفید را از جمله\u200cهای متقابل متقابل یاد بگیرد. ما همچنین با یک عملکرد از دست دادن هیبرید آزمایش می کنیم، یک ترکیب از دست دادن انتروپی و از دست دادن درجه، برای افزایش جدایی در امتیاز مختصات. بالاخره، ما ویژگی\u200cهای بوسیله\u200cی WordNet را شامل می\u200cکنیم تا عملکرد مدل ما را بیشتر بهتر کنیم. بهترین مدل ما به عنوان یک امتیاز F1(مکرو) از 74.2 و 84.8 در زیر سطح 1.1 و 1.2 رسیده است.', 'sw': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 7 - given an entity-tagged text from the ACL Anthology corpus, identify and classify pairs of entities that have one of six possible semantic relationships.  Mfano wetu una mtandao wa neura unaohusisha maneno yaliyofunzwa kabla ya mafunzo, vikosi vingi vingi vingi vingi vinavyojifunza vifaa vinavyofaa kujifunza kwa manufaa kutoka kwenye sentensi zilizopangwa. Pia tunajaribu kwa mfululizo wa kupoteza huduma hiyo, muunganiko wa kupoteza kwa watu na kupoteza kwa upande mwingine, ili kuongeza tofauti katika vipindi vya usambazaji. Lastly, we include WordNet-based features to further improve the performance of our model.  Mfano wetu bora unaweza kufikia score ya F1(makro) ya 74.2 na 84.8 kwenye mipango ya 1.1 na 1.2.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň ýaryşymyzy SemEval Biziň modelimiz, EKI-abstraktlary we birnäçe äpişgäniň üýtgewleri otomatik bilen taýýarlanan sözlerden ullanmak üçin birnäçe täze bir netwaral şebekedendir. Biz hem hybrid ýitirmek funksiýasy bilen, cross-entropi ýitirmek we çykarmak bilen synanyşýarys, klasifikasiýa çykarmak üçin a ýrylmak üçin synanyşýarys. Soňunda WordNet-den tabanly çykyşlarymyzy nusgamyzyň üstüne gelişmek üçin dahil edýäris. Biziň iň gowy nusgymyz 1.1 we 1.2 derejä F1(makro) sanynyň 74.2 we 84.8 sanynyň üstüne ýetip barýar.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons toegang tot SemEval-2018 Taak 7 - gegee 'n entiteit-etiket teks van die ACL Anthologie korpus, identifiseer en klassifiseer paar entiteite wat een van ses moontlike semantiese verhouding het. Ons model bestaan van 'n konvolusionele neuralnetwerk wat voor- onderwerp word inbêring, ongeabelde ACL- abstrakte, en veelvuldige venster grootte om outomaties nuttige funksies te leer van entiteitetiketeerde teikens. Ons het ook eksperimenteer met 'n hybrid verlies funksie, 'n kombinasie van kruis-entropie verlies en ranking verlies, om die skeiding in klassifikasie telling te verhoog. Las, ons insluit WordNet-gebaseerde funksies om die prestasie van ons model verder te verbeter. Ons beste model bereik 'n F1( makro) telling van 74. 2 en 84. 8 op subtaske 1. 1 en 1. 2, respectively.", 'am': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 7 - given an entity-tagged text from the ACL Anthology corpus, identify and classify pairs of entities that have one of six possible semantic relationships.  ሞዴሌያችን አስቀድሞ የተጠቃሚ ቃላት፣ ያልታወቀ ACL-abstracts፣ እና በብዙ መስኮት መጠን ለራሳቸው የተጠቃሚ ምርጫዎችን ለመማር የሚችል የኔቱር መረብ ነው፡፡ የኬብሪድ ጠንካራ ስህተት፣ የኢንተሮፓ ክፍል እና የክፍለ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ እና የመለየት ክፍል ክፍተቶችን ለማበጀት እናደርጋለን፡፡ Lastly, we include WordNet-based features to further improve the performance of our model.  ትልቁ ምሳሌያችን በመስኮታችን 1.1 እና 1.2 ነጥብ የሚደረገውን የF1 (ማክሮን) score 74.2 እና 84.8 ያገኛል።', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր մոտեցումը ՍեմԵվալ 2018-ի 7-ի հանձնարարությանը, հաշվի առնելով ACL-ի անտոլոգիայի կորպուսից նշված էության տեքստը, հայտնաբերում և դասակարգում են մի զույգ էության, որոնք ունեն վեց հնարավոր սեմանտիկ Մեր մոդելը կազմված է համընդհանուր նյարդային ցանց, որը օգտագործում է նախապատրաստված բառերի ներգրավումներ, աննշանակված ACL-աբստրակտներ և բազմաթիվ պատուհանների չափսեր, որոնք ինքնաբերաբար օգտակար առանձնահատկություններ են սովորում միավորների Մենք նաև փորձում ենք հիբրիդ կորստի ֆունկցիայի հետ, խաչը էնտրոպիայի կորստի և դասակարգման կորստի համակցության հետ, որպեսզի բարձրացնենք դասակարգման գնահատականների բաժանումը: Վերջապես, մենք ներառում ենք WordNet-ի հիմնված առանձնահատկություններ, որպեսզի ավելի լավ բարելավենք մեր մոդելի արդյունքը: Մեր լավագույն մոդելը հասնում է F1(մակարո) գնահատականի 74.2 և 84.8 անգամ 1.1 և 1.2 ենթահարցերի վրա:', 'bs': 'Ovaj novinar opisuje naš pristup zadatku 7 od polu Eval-2018 - s obzirom na tekst označenog entiteta iz Anthologijskog korpusa ACL-a, identificiranje i klasifikacija par entiteta koji imaju jednu od šest mogućih semantičkih odnosa. Naš model se sastoji od konvolucionalne neuralne mreže koja uključuje pre-obučene integracije riječi, neoznačene ACL-abstrakte i višestruke veličine prozora kako bi automatski naučila korisne funkcije iz rečenica označene na entiteti. Također eksperimentiramo sa funkcijom gubitka hibrida, kombinacijom gubitka kroz entropiju i gubitka reda, kako bismo povećali razdvajanje u klasifikacijskim rezultatima. Na kraju, uključujemo karakteristike na WordNetu kako bismo dalje poboljšali učinkovitost našeg modela. Naš najbolji model postiže rezultat F1(makro) od 74,2 i 84,8 na podatke 1,1 i 1,2.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের কাছে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ ব্যাখ্যা করেছে - এসিএল এন্টোলোগি কোর্পাস থেকে একটি বস্তুটি ট্যাগ করা লেখা দিয়েছে, যাদের মধ্যে ছয় আমাদের মডেলের মধ্যে রয়েছে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ বিভিন্ন প্রতিষ্ঠান, অলাইনের ACL-আটক্রাক্ট এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ব্যবহারের বৈশিষ্ট্য শিক্ষা প্রদান করার জন আমরা হাইব্রিডের ক্ষতিসাধন, ক্রস-এন্ট্রোপি ক্ষতি এবং রেঙ্কিং ক্ষতির একটি সংযুক্ত পরীক্ষায় পরীক্ষা করছি, যাতে বিভাগের স্কোরে  শেষে, আমরা ওয়ার্ডনেট ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে আছি আমাদের মডেলের প্রভাব আরো উন্নত করার জন্য। আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভালো মডেল সাবটাস ১. ১ এবং ১.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, ACL Anthologiya korpusundan etiket edilmiş bir mətn olaraq, altı mümkün semantik ilişkilərin birini təsdiqləyici və dəyişdirir. Bizim modellərimiz birləşdirilmiş nöral a ğ təhsil edilən əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş sözlər içərisində, etiket edilməmiş ACL-abstraktlardan və birçox pəncərə böyüklüyündən istifadə edilən cümlələrdən istifadə edilən faydalı xüsusiyyətlərdən olub. Biz həmçin in hibrid kaybı funksiyası ilə təcrübə edirik, çoxlu entropi kaybının və dərəcəli kaybının birləşdirilməsi üçün ayrılışını klasifikasyon dərəcələrində artırmaq üçün. Sonunda, modellərin performansını daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün WordNet tabanlı özellikləri daxil edirik. Ən yaxşı modellərimiz 1.1 və 1.2 subtasklarında 74.2 və 84.8 xərcləyici F1(makro) nöqtəsinə yetirir.', 'sq': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 7 - given an entity-tagged text from the ACL Anthology corpus, identify and classify pairs of entities that have one of six possible semantic relationships.  Our model consists of a convolutional neural network leveraging pre-trained word embeddings, unlabeled ACL-abstracts, and multiple window sizes to automatically learn useful features from entity-tagged sentences.  Ne gjithashtu eksperimentojmë me një funksion humbjeje hibride, një kombinim humbjeje ndër-entropi dhe humbje renditjeje, për të rritur ndarjen në rezultatet klasifikuese. Më në fund, ne përfshijmë karakteristika bazuar në WordNet për të përmirësuar më tej performancën e modelit tonë. Modeli ynë më i mirë arrin një rezultat F1(makro) prej 74.2 dhe 84.8 në nënpyetjet 1.1 dhe 1.2 respektivisht.', 'cs': 'Tento příspěvek popisuje náš přístup k SemEval-2018 Task 7.s využitím entity-tagovaného textu z ACL Anthology korpusu, identifikuje a klasifikuje páry entit, které mají jeden ze šesti možných sémantických vztahů. Náš model se skládá z konvoluční neuronové sítě využívající předem trénované vložení slov, neoznačené ACL abstrakty a několik velikostí oken k automatickému učení užitečných funkcí z vět označených entitou. Dále experimentujeme s hybridní ztrátovou funkcí, kombinací ztráty křížové entropie a ztráty hodnocení, abychom zvýšili oddělení klasifikačního skóre. V neposlední řadě zahrnujeme funkce založené na WordNet pro další zlepšení výkonu našeho modelu. Náš nejlepší model dosahuje F1(makro) skóre 74.2 a 84.8 na dílčích úkolech 1.1 a 1.2.', 'ca': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 7 - given an entity-tagged text from the ACL Anthology corpus, identify and classify pairs of entities that have one of six possible semantic relationships.  Our model consists of a convolutional neural network leveraging pre-trained word embeddings, unlabeled ACL-abstracts, and multiple window sizes to automatically learn useful features from entity-tagged sentences.  We also experiment with a hybrid loss function, a combination of cross-entropy loss and ranking loss, to boost the separation in classification scores.  Lastly, we include WordNet-based features to further improve the performance of our model.  Our best model achieves an F1(macro) score of 74.2 and 84.8 on subtasks 1.1 and 1.2, respectively.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvaillaan lähestymistapaamme SemEval-2018 Task 7: ACL Anthology -korpusesta peräisin olevan entiteettitunnisteen avulla tunnistetaan ja luokitellaan entiteettipareja, joilla on yksi kuudesta mahdollisesta semanttisesta suhteesta. Mallimme koostuu konvolutionaalisesta neuroverkosta, joka hyödyntää ennalta koulutettuja sanaupotuksia, merkitsemättömiä ACL-abstrakteja ja useita ikkunakokoja oppiakseen automaattisesti hyödyllisiä ominaisuuksia entiteettitunnisteilla varustetuista lauseista. Kokeilemme myös hybridihappofunktiota, joka on yhdistelmä ristientropiahäviötä ja sijoitushäviötä, parantaaksemme luokituspisteiden erottelua. Lisäksi tarjoamme WordNet-pohjaisia ominaisuuksia mallimme suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi entisestään. Paras mallimme saavuttaa F1 (makro) -pisteet 74,2 alatehtävissä 1,1 ja 84,8.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie lähenemisviisi SemEval-2018 ülesandele 7 – võttes arvesse olemi sildiga teksti ACL Anthology korpusest, identifitseerime ja klassifitseerime olemipaare, millel on üks kuuest võimalikust semantilisest seosest. Meie mudel koosneb konvolutsioonilisest närvivõrgust, mis kasutab eelnevalt väljaõpetatud sõnade manustamist, märgistamata ACL-abstrakte ja mitut aknasuurust, et automaatselt õppida kasulikke funktsioone olemi sildiga lausetest. Samuti katsetame hübriidkaotusfunktsiooni, mis on ristentroopia kaotuse ja järjestuse kaotuse kombinatsioon, et suurendada klassifitseerimisskooride eraldamist. Lisame WordNetil põhinevaid funktsioone, et meie mudeli jõudlust veelgi parandada. Meie parim mudel saavutab F1 (makro) skoori 74,2 ja 84,8 alamülesannetel 1,1 ja 1,2.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun yana bayyana hanyarmu zuwa aikin SemEal-2018 - da aka ba wani matsayi-taged daga nau'in anti-AMIL, ya gane kuma ya ƙayyade nau'in-nau'i biyu wanda yana da ɗayan danganta 6 masu yiwuwa na semantic. Misalinmu na ƙunsa da wani jerin neural wanda ke samar da tsarin da aka yi wa zaman-wa'anar magana, da ba'a yi amfani da shi ba, kuma girmar taga masu yawa da za'a sanar da tsari masu amfani da farat ɗaya daga cire-tagogi. Kayya, suna jarraba da wani hasara na Hybri, komai da hasara ta guda da hasara ta ranka, dõmin mu ƙara rarrabin sigarani cikin fassarar. Gani, za mu sami wasu sifafai a kan WdNet dõmin Mu ƙara kyautar tsarin misalinmu. Babu misalinmu ya sami wani nau'i na F1(macro) na shekara 74.2 da 84.8 a kan subaikin 1.1 da 1.2.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš pristop k nalogi SemEval-2018 7 - glede na besedilo z oznako entitete iz korpusa ACL Anthology identificira in razvrsti pare entitet, ki imajo enega od šestih možnih semantičnih relacij. Naš model je sestavljen iz konvolucijskega nevronskega omrežja, ki izkorišča vnaprej usposobljene vdelave besed, neoznačene povzetke ACL in več velikosti oken za samodejno učenje uporabnih funkcij iz stavkov z oznakami entitete. Prav tako eksperimentiramo s hibridno funkcijo izgube, kombinacijo izgube navzkrižne entropije in izgube razvrstitve, da bi povečali ločevanje ocen klasifikacije. Nazadnje vključujemo funkcije, ki temeljijo na WordNetu, za nadaljnje izboljšanje učinkovitosti našega modela. Naš najboljši model doseže oceno F1 (makro) 74,2 oziroma 84,8 pri podopravilih 1,1 oziroma 1,2.', 'jv': 'Bu leter rambarangé awakdhéwé sampeyan mrêvewih karo semi-2008 task 7 - nyebuté awak dhéwé éntukno nggawe barang kelas diwekke dipunangé awak dhéwé, beraksi lan kelas dhéwé sampeyan sampeyan winih. Monday Anyone here Rasane, awak dhéwé mulai pernik word net-basa kanggo luwih ireng maneh sing bisa nyebute nggawe modèl. Monday', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐབས་ལ SemEval-2018 Task 7 དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བཀོད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདུག་ནི་ས convolutional neural network leveraging pre-trained word embeddings, unlabeled ACL-abstracts, and multiple window sizes to automatically learn useful features from entity-tagged sentences. We also experiment with a hybrid loss function, a combination of cross-entropy loss and ranking loss, to boost the separation in classification scores. མཐའ་མར་དུ། ང་ཚོས་WordNet་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཕར་རྒྱས་གཏ ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱིས་1.1 དང 1.2 ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཨང་གྲངས་དང་། 74.2 དང་། 84.8 ཕྱོགས་གཟུགས་ཀྱིས་ཡོད།', 'he': 'This paper describes our approach to SemEval-2018 Task 7 - given an entity-tagged text from the ACL Anthology corpus, identify and classify pairs of entities that have one of six possible semantic relationships.  המודל שלנו מורכב מרשת עצבית משותפת משתמשת מילים מאומנות מראש, אסטרקטים ACL ללא סימנים, וגודלים מרובים של חלונות כדי ללמוד אוטומטית תכונות שימושיות משפטים עם תוויות יחידות. אנחנו גם מנסים עם פעילות אובדן היברידי, שילוב של אובדן אנטרופיה צלב ואבדן הדרגה, כדי להעלות את ההפרדה בתוצאות קלאספיה. סוף סוף, אנחנו מכילים תכונות מבוססים על WordNet כדי לשפר את ההופעה של המודל שלנו. המודל הטוב ביותר שלנו משיג נקודת F1 (מקרו) של 74.2 ו-84.8 על תחתונות 1.1 ו-1.2, בהתאם.'}
{'en': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 Task 8 : Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'ar': 'TeamDL في SemEval-2018 المهمة 8: تحليل نص الأمن السيبراني باستخدام الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية والحقول العشوائية المشروطة', 'fr': "TeamDL au salon SEMEVAL-2018 Task 8\xa0: Analyse de textes de cybersécurité à l'aide d'un réseau de neurones convolutifs et de champs aléatoires", 'es': 'TeamDL en SemEval-2018 Tarea 8: Análisis de textos de ciberseguridad mediante redes neuronales convolucionales y campos aleatorios condicionales', 'pt': 'TeamDL na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 8: Análise de texto de segurança cibernética usando rede neural convolucional e campos aleatórios condicionais', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のTeamDLタスク8 ：畳み込みニューラルネットワークと条件付きランダムフィールドを使用したサイバーセキュリティのテキスト分析', 'zh': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 务8:用卷积神经网络随字网络安全文本', 'ru': 'TeamDL на SemEval-2018 Задача 8: Анализ текста кибербезопасности с использованием сверточной нейронной сети и условных случайных полей', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 8 पर TeamDL: Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क और सशर्त यादृच्छिक फ़ील्ड का उपयोग कर साइबर सुरक्षा पाठ विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'TeamDL ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 8: Cibearshlándáil Anailís Téacs ag baint úsáide as Líonra Néarach Comhtháite agus Réimsí Randamacha Coinníollacha', 'hu': 'TeamDL a SemEval-2018 8. feladat: Kiberbiztonsági szövegelemzés konvolúciós neurális hálózatokkal és feltételes véletlenszerű mezőkkel', 'el': 'Εργασία 8: Ανάλυση Κειμένου Κυβερνητικής Ασφάλειας με χρήση Νευρικού Δικτύου και Τυχαίων Πεδίων υπό όρους', 'kk': 'Орындағы TeamDL 8 тапсырмасында: Кеңіл қауіпсіздік мәтін талдауы Қосымшалық нейралық желі және шарт кездейсоқ өрістерді қолдану', 'lt': 'TeamDL pusevalio 2018 m. 8 užduotis: kibernetinio saugumo teksto analizė naudojant konvolucinį nervinį tinklą ir sąlyginius atsitiktinius laukus', 'mk': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'ka': 'TeamDL SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 8: კიბერსუკური ტექსტის ანალიზაცია გამოყენებული კონტუალური ნეიროლური ქსელი და შემდეგ პარამეტრები', 'ms': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 8: സൈബെര്\u200dസിക്ക് ലെക്സ്റ്റ് അന്യായം', 'it': 'TeamDL al SemEval-2018 Task 8: Analisi del testo di sicurezza informatica utilizzando la rete neurale conveluzionale e campi casuali condizionali', 'mn': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'pl': 'Zadanie 8: Analiza tekstu cyberbezpieczeństwa przy użyciu konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej i warunkowych polach losowych', 'ro': 'TeamDL la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 8: Analiza textului de securitate cibernetică utilizând rețeaua neuronală conveluțională și câmpuri aleatorii condiționate', 'sr': 'TeamDL na semiEval-2018 zadatku 8: analiza teksta sajber sigurnosti koristeći konvolucionalnu Neuralnu mrežu i uslovne slučajne polje', 'no': 'TeamDL ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 8: Sørsleikskoritetekstanalyser ved hjelp av konvolusjonell neiralnettverk og tilfeldig', 'so': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Analysis Text Security Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'mt': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'sv': 'TeamDL på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 8: Textanalys av cybersäkerhet med hjälp av konvulutivt neuralt nätverk och villkorliga slumpmässiga fält', 'si': 'Group DL at Halfeval-2018 Job 8: Cyber Secure Text Explosion', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 8: சைப்பர் பாதுகாப்பு உரை Analysis using Convolution Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'ur': 'ٹیمیڈل ٹیمیڈل ۲۰۱۸ ٹاکس ۸ میں: سائبر سیکورٹی ٹیکس ٹیکسٹ تحلیل کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Vazifani 8: Tovush Neural Tarmoq va Hodisa Tasodifiy Maydon yordamida Kb- xavfsiz matn Analysis', 'vi': 'Thiết Quyền bảo mật (khôn ngoan) của SemEvol-208: Kết quả Văn bản an ninh mạng sử dụng mạng thần kinh có liên hệ và trường hợp khẩn cấp', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Текстов анализ на киберсигурността чрез конвелуционна неврална мрежа и условни случайни полета', 'da': 'TeamDL på SemEval-2018 Opgave 8: Cybersikkerhedstekstanalyse ved hjælp af konvulutivt neuralt netværk og betingede tilfældige felter', 'nl': 'TeamDL bij SemEval-2018 Taak 8: Cybersecurity Tekst Analyse met behulp van Convolutional Neural Network en Conditional Random Fields', 'hr': 'TeamDL na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 8: analiza teksta za sajber sigurnost koristeći konvolucionalnu neuronu mrežu i uvjetne slučajne polje', 'de': 'TeamDL bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 8: Cybersecurity Textanalyse mit Hilfe von Convolutional Neuroral Network und Conditional Random Fields', 'id': 'TeamDL di SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Analisi Teks Sibersiguriti menggunakan Jaringan Neural Konvelusional dan Medan Random Kondisional', 'sw': 'TeamDL katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 8: Uchambuzi wa Matambo ya Usalama wa Mtandao wa Kijerumani na Maeneo ya Hali', 'tr': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'fa': 'TeamDL at semiEval-2018 Task 8: Analysis of Cybersecurity Text using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'ko': 'TeamDL이SemEval-18 작업 8: 권적 신경 네트워크와 조건 랜덤 필드를 이용한 네트워크 보안 텍스트 분석', 'hy': 'XML-ի թիմը, որը գտնվում է "Haleewal-2018" 8-րդ հանձնարարում. կիբեր ապահովության տեքստի վերլուծություն օգտագործելով հակառակցող նյարդային ցանց և պայմանավոր պատահական դաշտեր', 'af': 'TeamDL by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 8: Sibersekuriteit Teks Analiseer met gebruik van Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerk en Conditional Random Velde', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৮: সাইবার নিরাপত্তা টেক্সট বিশ্লেষণ কনভোলেশনাল নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক এবং পরিস্থিতির ক্ষেত্রে ব্যবহার করে', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'sq': 'TeamDL në SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Sajber Qüvvətli Metin Analizi', 'ca': 'TeamDL a SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'cs': 'Úkol 8: Analýza textu kybernetické bezpečnosti pomocí konveluční neuronové sítě a podmíněných náhodných polí', 'bs': 'TeamDL na semiEval-2018 zadatku 8: analiza teksta za sajber sigurnost koristeći konvolucionalnu neuronu mrežu i uslovne slučajne polje', 'et': 'TeamDL SemEval-2018 ülesanne 8: Küberturvalisuse tekstianalüüs konvolutsioonilise neurovõrgu ja tingimuslike juhuslike väljade abil', 'fi': 'TeamDL SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 8: Kyberturvallisuuden tekstianalyysi konvolutionaalisen hermoverkon ja ehdollisten satunnaiskenttien avulla', 'sk': 'TeamDL na SemEval-2018 naloga 8: Analiza besedila kibernetske varnosti s konvolucijskim živčnim omrežjem in pogojnimi naključnimi polji', 'jv': 'group', 'he': 'TeamDL ב SemEval-2018 משימה 8: ניתוח טקסט Cybersecurity בשימוש רשת נוירולית משתנה ושדות אקראיים', 'ha': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields', 'bo': 'TeamDL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Text Analysis using Convolutional Neural Network and Conditional Random Fields'}
{'en': 'In this work we present our participation to SemEval-2018 Task 8 subtasks 1 & 2 respectively. We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2). We experimented with couple of word embedding strategies, feature sets and achieved competitive performance across the two subtasks. For subtask 1 We experimented with two category of word embeddings namely native embeddings and task specific embedding using Word2vec and Glove algorithms. Native Embeddings : All words including the unknown ones that are randomly initialized use embeddings from original Word2vec / Glove models. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec / Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1. For subtask 2, we used N-grams of size 6, previous, next tokens and labels, features giving disjunctions of words anywhere in the left or right, word shape features, word lemma of current, previous and next words, word-tag pair features, POS tags, prefix and suffixes.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل نقدم مشاركتنا في المهام الفرعية 1 و 2 المهمة 8 لبرنامج SemEval-2018 على التوالي. قمنا بتطوير نظام Convolution Neural Network لتصنيف جملة البرامج الضارة (المهمة الفرعية 1) ونظام الحقول العشوائية الشرطية للتنبؤ بتسمية الرموز المميزة للبرامج الضارة (المهمة الفرعية 2). لقد جربنا بضع استراتيجيات لتضمين الكلمات ومجموعات الميزات وحققنا أداءً تنافسيًا عبر المهمتين الفرعيتين. بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية 1 ، جربنا فئتين من حفلات الزفاف ، وهما حفلات الزفاف الأصلية والتضمين الخاص بالمهمة باستخدام خوارزميات Word2vec و Glove. 1. الزخارف الأصلية: جميع الكلمات بما في ذلك الكلمات المجهولة التي تم تهيئتها عشوائيًا تستخدم الزخارف من نماذج Word2vec / Glove الأصلية. 2. مهمة محددة: يتم إنشاء عمليات التضمين من خلال تدريب خوارزميات Word2vec / Glove على جمل من MalwareTextDB وجدنا أن القفاز يتفوق في الأداء على باقي عمليات التضمين للمهمة الفرعية 1. بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية 2 ، استخدمنا N-grams بحجم 6 ، الرموز المميزة والسابقة والتالية ، ميزات إعطاء مفارقات الكلمات في أي مكان في اليسار أو اليمين ، وميزات شكل الكلمة ، و lemma للكلمات الحالية ، والسابقة والتالية ، وميزات زوج علامة الكلمات ، وعلامات POS ، والبادئة واللواحق.', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho apresentamos nossa participação no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 8 subtarefas 1 e 2 respectivamente. Desenvolvemos o sistema Convolution Neural Network para classificação de sentenças de malware (subtarefa 1) e o sistema Conditional Random Fields para previsão de rótulo de token de malware (subtarefa 2). Experimentamos algumas estratégias de incorporação de palavras, conjuntos de recursos e obtivemos desempenho competitivo nas duas subtarefas. Para a subtarefa 1, experimentamos duas categorias de incorporação de palavras, a saber, incorporação nativa e incorporação específica de tarefa usando os algoritmos Word2vec e Glove. 1. Embeddings Nativos: Todas as palavras, incluindo as desconhecidas que são inicializadas aleatoriamente, usam embeddings dos modelos originais do Word2vec/Glove. 2. Específico da tarefa: Os embeddings são gerados treinando algoritmos Word2vec/Glove em frases do MalwareTextDB Descobrimos que o glove supera o resto dos embeddings para a subtarefa 1. Para a subtarefa 2, usamos N-grams de tamanho 6, anterior, próximo tokens e rótulos , recursos que fornecem disjunções de palavras em qualquer lugar à esquerda ou à direita, recursos de forma de palavra, lema da palavra atual, palavras anteriores e próximas, recursos de pares palavra-tag, tags POS, prefixo e sufixos.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous présentons notre participation aux sous-tâches 1 et 2 de la tâche 8 de SEMEVAL-2018 respectivement. Nous avons développé un système de réseau neuronal à convolution pour la classification des phrases de logiciels malveillants (sous-tâche 1) et un système de champs aléatoires conditionnels pour la prédiction d'étiquettes de jetons de logiciels malveillants (sous-tâche 2) Nous avons expérimenté quelques stratégies d'intégration de mots, des ensembles de fonctionnalités et avons obtenu des performances compétitives pour les deux sous-tâches. Pour la sous-tâche 1 Nous avons expérimenté deux catégories d'intégrations de mots, à savoir les intégrations natives et l'intégration spécifique à une tâche à l'aide des algorithmes Word2VEC et Glove. 1. Embeddings natifs\xa0: Tous les mots, y compris les mots inconnus, qui sont initialisés de manière aléatoire utilisent des incorporations issues des modèles Word2VEC/Glove originaux. 2. Spécifique à la tâche\xa0: Les intégrations sont générées par l'entraînement des algorithmes Word2VEC/Glove sur des phrases de MalwareTextDB Nous avons constaté que le gant surpasse le reste des intégrations pour la sous-tâche 1. Pour la sous-tâche 2, nous avons utilisé des N-grammes de taille 6, des jetons et des étiquettes précédent et suivant, des entités donnant des disjonctions de mots n'importe où dans la gauche ou la droite, des caractéristiques de forme de mot, le lemme des mots actuels, précédents et suivants, des caractéristiques de paire mot-étiquette, des balises POS, des préfixes et des suffixes.", 'es': 'En este trabajo presentamos nuestra participación en las subtareas 1 y 2 de la Tarea 8 de SemEval-2018, respectivamente. Desarrollamos el sistema Convolution Neural Network para la clasificación de sentencias de malware (subtarea 1) y el sistema de campos aleatorios condicionales para la predicción de etiquetas de tokens de malware (subtarea 2). Experimentamos con un par de estrategias de incrustación de palabras, conjuntos de funciones y logramos un rendimiento competitivo en las dos subtareas. Para la subtarea 1 Experimentamos con dos categorías de incrustaciones de palabras, a saber, incrustaciones nativas e incrustaciones específicas de tareas utilizando los algoritmos Word2vec y Glove. Incrustaciones nativas: Todas las palabras, incluidas las desconocidas, que se inicializan aleatoriamente utilizan incrustaciones de los modelos originales de Word2VEC/Glove. Tarea específica: Las incrustaciones se generan mediante el entrenamiento de algoritmos Word2VEC/Glove en oraciones de MalwareTextDB. Descubrimos que glove supera al resto de incrustaciones para la subtarea 1. Para la subtarea 2, utilizamos N-gramas de tamaño 6, símbolos y etiquetas anteriores y siguientes, características que dan disyunciones de palabras en cualquier parte izquierda o derecha, características de forma de palabra, lema de palabra de palabras actual, anterior y siguiente, funciones de par palabra-etiqueta, etiquetas POS, prefijos y sufijos.', 'ja': 'この作業では、SemEval -2018タスク8サブタスク1とサブタスク2にそれぞれ参加しています。 マルウェア文分類のためのConvolution Neural Networkシステム（サブタスク1 ）とマルウェアトークンラベル予測のためのConditional Random Fieldsシステム（サブタスク2 ）を開発した。 私たちは、いくつかの単語埋め込み戦略、機能セットを実験し、2つのサブタスクにわたって競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成しました。 サブタスク1では、ネイティブ埋め込みとWord 2 vecおよびGloveアルゴリズムを使用したタスク固有の埋め込みの2つのカテゴリを実験しました。1. ネイティブ埋め込み:ランダムに初期化された未知のものを含むすべての単語は、オリジナルのWord 2 vec/Gloveモデルからの埋め込みを使用します。2. タスク固有:埋め込みは、MalwareTextDBからの文章のWord 2 vec/Gloveアルゴリズムのトレーニングによって生成されます。サブタスク1の埋め込みの他の部分よりもGloveのパフォーマンスが優れていることがわかりました。 サブタスク2では、サイズ6、前、次のトークンとラベルのNグラム、左右の任意の位置に単語の分岐を与える機能、単語形状の機能、現在の単語のレマ、前後の単語、単語タグのペア機能、POSタグ、プレフィックスとサフィックスを使用しました。', 'hi': 'इस काम में हम SemEval-2018 कार्य 8 subtasks 1 और 2 क्रमशः करने के लिए हमारी भागीदारी प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमने मैलवेयर वाक्य वर्गीकरण (सबटास्क 1) और मैलवेयर टोकन लेबल पूर्वानुमान (सबटास्क 2) के लिए सशर्त रैंडम फील्ड्स सिस्टम के लिए कनवल्शन न्यूरल नेटवर्क सिस्टम विकसित किया है। हमने कुछ शब्द एम्बेडिंग रणनीतियों, फीचर सेट के साथ प्रयोग किया और दो उप-कार्यों में प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन हासिल किया। Subtask 1 के लिए हमने Word2vec और Glove एल्गोरिदम का उपयोग करके शब्द एम्बेडिंग की दो श्रेणी अर्थात् देशी एम्बेडिंग और कार्य विशिष्ट एम्बेडिंग के साथ प्रयोग किया। 1. मूल एम्बेडिंग: यादृच्छिक रूप से प्रारंभ किए गए अज्ञात लोगों सहित सभी शब्द मूल Word2vec/ दस्ताने मॉडल से एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं। 2. कार्य विशिष्ट: embeddings MalwareTextDB से वाक्यों पर Word2vec / दस्ताने एल्गोरिदम प्रशिक्षण द्वारा उत्पन्न कर रहे हैं हमने पाया कि दस्ताने subtask 1 के लिए embeddings के बाकी outperforms. सबटास्क 2 के लिए, हमने आकार 6, पिछले, अगले टोकन और लेबल के एन-ग्राम का उपयोग किया, बाएं या दाएं कहीं भी शब्दों के विघटन देने वाली विशेषताएं, शब्द आकार विशेषताएं, शब्द आकार विशेषताएं, वर्तमान, पिछले और अगले शब्दों के शब्द लेम्मा, शब्द-टैग जोड़ी विशेषताएं, पीओएस टैग, उपसर्ग और प्रत्यय।', 'zh': '于是各以SemEval-2018事8子职1与2参之。 发于恶意软件类(子职1)卷积神经网络系统与恶意软件令牌表随机字段统(子2)。 我试了几种词,并在两个子务中成了竞性能。 子职 1,尝试二词嵌之,即本机嵌用 Word2vec 、 Glove 算法特定嵌。 1. 原生嵌:凡单词,随机初始化未知单词,皆用原始Word2vec/Glove模形中嵌之。 2.特定曰:嵌者,MolwareTextDB之句Word2vec / Glove算法而生者手套优于子务1者也。 子 2者,以大小为 6 N 元语法、上一、下一、标签、左右任位单词析取、字形、前、上、下一单词词引理、单词标、POS 、前缀、后缀。', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы представляем наше участие в задаче 8 SemEval-2018, подзадачи 1 и 2 соответственно. Мы разработали Convolution Neural Network system для классификации предложений вредоносных программ (подзадача 1) и Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (подзадача 2). Мы экспериментировали с парой стратегий встраивания слов, наборами функций и достигли конкурентной производительности по двум подзадачам. Для подзадачи 1 мы экспериментировали с двумя категориями вложений слов, а именно нативными вложениями и вложениями конкретных задач с использованием алгоритмов Word2vec и Glove. 1. Родные вставки: Все слова, включая неизвестные, которые случайным образом инициализированы, используют вставки из оригинальных моделей Word2vec/Glove. 2. Конкретная задача: вставки генерируются обучающими алгоритмами Word2vec/Glove на предложениях из MalwareTextDB Мы обнаружили, что перчатки превосходят остальные вложения для подзадачи 1. Для подзадачи 2 мы использовали N-граммы размера 6, предыдущие, следующие маркеры и метки, признаки, дающие дизъюнкции слов в любом месте слева или справа, признаки формы слова, лемму слов текущего, предыдущего и следующего слов, признаки пары слов-тегов, POS-теги, префиксы и суффиксы.', 'ga': "San obair seo cuirimid ár rannpháirtíocht i láthair i bhfothasc 8 de Thasc 1 & 2 SemEval-2018 faoi seach. D’fhorbraíomar córas Convolution Neural Network le haghaidh aicmiú abairtí mailíseacha (fothasc 1) agus córas Réimsí Randamach Coinníollacha chun lipéad comharthaí malware a thuar (fothasc 2). Rinneamar turgnamh le straitéisí leabú cúpla focal, tacair gné agus bhaineamar amach feidhmíocht iomaíoch ar fud an dá fhothasc. Le haghaidh fhothasc 1 rinneamar turgnamh le dhá chatagóir de leabú focal, eadhon leabú dúchasach agus leabú tasc-shonrach ag baint úsáide as algartaim Word2vec agus Glove. 1. Leabaithe Dúchais: Úsáideann gach focal lena n-áirítear na cinn anaithnid a chuirtear inisealacha go randamach leabú ó bhunmhúnlaí Word2vec/Glove. 2. Tasc sonrach : Gintear na leabaithe trí halgartaim Word2vec/Glove a thraenáil ar abairtí ó MalwareTextDB Fuaireamar amach go sáraíonn an lámhainn an chuid eile de leabú d'fhothasc 1. Le haghaidh fhothasc 2, d'úsáideamar N-gram de mhéid 6, roimhe seo, na chéad chomharthaí eile agus lipéid , gnéithe a thugann deighiltí focal áit ar bith ar chlé nó ar dheis, gnéithe cruth na bhfocal, leamaí an fhocail reatha, na focail roimhe seo agus na chéad fhocail eile, gnéithe péire focal-chlib, clibeanna POS, réimír agus iarmhíreanna.", 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk részvételünket a SemEval-2018 Task 8 1. és 2. alcsoportjában. Fejlesztettük a Convolution Neural Network rendszert a rosszindulatú programok mondatok osztályozására (1. részfeladat) és a feltételes véletlen mezők rendszerét a rosszindulatú programok token címkéjének előrejelzésére (2. részfeladat). Kísérleteztünk néhány szóbeágyazási stratégiával, funkciókészletekkel, és versenyképes teljesítményt értünk el a két részfeladat között. Az 1. részfeladathoz a Word2vec és Glove algoritmusok segítségével két kategóriával kísérleteztünk, nevezetesen natív beágyazásokkal és feladatspecifikus beágyazással. 1. natív beágyazások: Minden szó, beleértve az ismeretleneket is, amelyeket véletlenszerűen inicializáltak, eredeti Word2vec/Kesztyű modellekből származó beágyazásokat használ. Feladatspecifikus: A beágyazásokat a Word2vec/Glove algoritmusok kiképzésével hozzák létre MalwareTextDB mondataira. Megtaláltuk, hogy a kesztyű felülmúlja a többi beágyazást az 1. részfeladatban. A 2. részfeladathoz 6-os méretű N grammokat, előző, következő tokeneket és címkéket használtunk, a szavak bárhol balra vagy jobbra leválasztását adó funkciókat, szóalakzat funkciókat, aktuális, előző és következő szavak lemmáját, szó-címke pár funkciókat, POS címkéket, előtagot és utótagokat.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία παρουσιάζουμε τη συμμετοχή μας στην εργασία 8 υποτάξεων 1.2 αντίστοιχα. Αναπτύξαμε σύστημα Νευρικού Δικτύου Σύγκλισης για ταξινόμηση προτάσεων κακόβουλου λογισμικού (δευτερεύουσα εργασία 1) και σύστημα Τυχαίων Πεδίων υπό όρους για πρόβλεψη ετικετών διακριτικών κακόβουλου λογισμικού (δευτερεύουσα εργασία 2). Πειραματιστήκαμε με δύο στρατηγικές ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, σύνολα χαρακτηριστικών και επιτύχαμε ανταγωνιστική απόδοση στις δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Πειραματιστήκαμε με δύο κατηγορίες ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, δηλαδή εγγενείς ενσωμάτωσης και εξειδικευμένη ενσωμάτωση εργασίας χρησιμοποιώντας αλγόριθμους και Glove. 1. Αυτόχθονες ενσωματώσεις: Όλες οι λέξεις συμπεριλαμβανομένων των άγνωστων που είναι τυχαία αρχικοποιημένες χρησιμοποιούν ενσωματώσεις από τα πρωτότυπα μοντέλα. 2. Ειδική εργασία: Οι ενσωματώσεις παράγονται από την εκπαίδευση αλγορίθμων σε προτάσεις από το Βρήκαμε ότι το γάντι ξεπερνά τις υπόλοιπες ενσωματώσεις για δευτερεύουσες εργασίες 1. Για την δευτερεύουσα εργασία 2, χρησιμοποιήσαμε Ν-γραμμάρια μεγέθους 6, προηγούμενα, επόμενα μάρκα και ετικέτες, χαρακτηριστικά που δίνουν διαχωρισμούς λέξεων οπουδήποτε αριστερά ή δεξιά, χαρακτηριστικά σχήματος λέξης, λέμμα λέξης τρέχουσας, προηγούμενης και επόμενης λέξης, χαρακτηριστικά ζεύγους λέξης-ετικέτας, ετικέτες, πρόθεμα και επίθετα.', 'it': 'In questo lavoro presentiamo la nostra partecipazione a SemEval-2018 Task 8 sottoattività 1 e 2 rispettivamente. Abbiamo sviluppato il sistema Convolution Neural Network per la classificazione delle frasi malware (sottomissione 1) e il sistema Conditional Random Fields per la previsione delle etichette dei token malware (sottomissione 2). Abbiamo sperimentato un paio di strategie di embedding di parole, set di funzionalità e raggiunto prestazioni competitive tra le due sottoattività. Abbiamo sperimentato due categorie di embedding di parole: embedding nativi e embedding task specific utilizzando algoritmi Word2vec e Glove. 1. Incorporazioni native: Tutte le parole incluse quelle sconosciute che vengono inizializzate casualmente utilizzano incorporazioni dai modelli originali Word2vec/Glove. 2. Compito specifico: Le incorporazioni sono generate dalla formazione di algoritmi Word2vec/Glove su frasi da MalwareTextDB Abbiamo scoperto che glove supera il resto delle incorporazioni per la sottomissione 1. Per la sottomissione 2, abbiamo usato N-grammi di dimensione 6, token ed etichette precedenti, caratteristiche che danno disgiunzioni di parole ovunque a sinistra o a destra, caratteristiche di forma di parola, lemma di parole attuali, precedenti e successive, caratteristiche di coppia di parole-tag, tag POS, prefisso e suffissi.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыста біз біздің қатысушымызды 2018 жылдың semiEval-2018 тапсырмасына келтіреміз. 8 тапсырмасы 1 және 2 қатысушы. Біз жаңа жағдайда тұтас сөйлемелерді (1- суретті) және жаңа жаңа белгілерді бақылау үшін кездейсоқ өрістер жүйесін жасадық. Біз бірнеше сөздерді ендіру стратегиялары, мүмкіндіктерді баптау және бұл екі ішкі сұрақтардың арасындағы әрекеттерді жеткіздік. 1- сурет үшін Word2vec және Glove алгоритмдерді қолданып ендіру үшін екі сөздерді ендіру санатынан тәжірибедік. 1. Түпнұсқа ендіру: Барлық сөздер кездейсоқ бастау үшін Word2vec/Glove үлгілерінен ендірілген сөздер қолданылады. 2. Тапсырмалар ерекше : Word2vec/Glove алгоритмдері MalwareTextDB сөздерінің алгоритмдерінен құрылады. Біз қолданбалар 1- тің асты сұраныс үшін қалдық ендірулердің қалдығын жасайды. 2- сурет үшін біз 6, алдыңғы, келесі белгілер мен жарлықтар N- граммаларды қолдандық. Сол не оң жақтағы сөздердің кез келген жерде, сөздің пішімі, назардағы, алдыңғы және келесі сөздер, сөз- тегтердің екі мүмкіндіктері, POS тегтері, пре', 'lt': 'Šiame darbe pristatome savo dalyvavimą atitinkamai 8 užduoties 1 ir 2 papunkčiuose „SemEval-2018“. We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2).  Eksperimentavome su keliais žodžiais įtraukimo strategijomis, charakteristikų rinkiniais ir pasiekėme konkurencinius rezultatus dviejose paklausose. For subtask 1 We experimented with two category of word embeddings namely native embeddings and task specific embedding using Word2vec and Glove algorithms.  1. vietiniai įdėjimai: visi žodžiai, įskaitant nežinomus, kurie atsitiktinai inicijuojami, naudoja įdėjimus iš originalių Word2vec / pirštinės modelių. 2. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1.  For subtask 2, we used N-grams of size 6, previous, next tokens and labels, features giving disjunctions of words anywhere in the left or right, word shape features, word lemma of current, previous and next words, word-tag pair features, POS tags, prefix and suffixes.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენი დაწყვეტილებას SemEval-2018 დავამუშავებთ 8 სამუშაო 1 & 2. ჩვენ განვითარებეთ Convolution Neural Network System for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2). ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით ექსპერიმენტირებით სტრატიგიები, ფუნქტურების სხვები და კონკენტებური მუშაობას გავაკეთებეთ ორი სტრატიკ 1 წლის სექსპერიმენტისთვის ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებდით ორი კატეგორია სიტყვების სექსპერიმენტისთვის, რომელიც სიტყვების სექსპერიმენტისთვის დაყენება 1. მსოფლიო სიტყვები: ყველა სიტყვები, რომელიც არაფერად იცინტიალურად გამოყენებული Word2vec/Glove მოდელებიდან გამოყენება. 2. პარამეტრები განსაკუთრებულია : დაყენებები შექმნილია Word2vec/Glove ალგორიტიმებით MalwareTextDB-ის სიტყვების შესახებ, რომელსაც პლექტი გავაკეთება დასრულებების შესახებ 1. 2-ის საკითხვა, ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ N-გრამები 6, წინა, შემდეგი სიმბოლოები და ნიმბოლოები, სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოები, წინა და შემდეგი სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოები, POS-ნიმბოლოები, პრეფიქსი და სფექსიები.', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа го претставуваме нашето учество на SemEval-2018 задачата 8 потпрашува 1 и 2 односно. We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2).  Експериментиравме со неколку зборови на интегрирање стратегии, сетови на карактеристики и постигнавме конкурентна резултат во двете потпрашања. За подпрашање 1 Експериментиравме со две категории на вградувања на зборови, а потоа со домородни вградувања и задачи специфично вградување со користење на алгоритмите Word2vec и Ракавица. 1. Native Embeddings: All words including the unknown ones that are randomly initialized use embeddings from original Word2vec/Glove models.  2. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1.  За подпрашање 2, користевме N-грами од големина 6, претходни, следни знаци и етикети, карактеристики кои даваат раздвојувања на зборовите било каде на лево или десно, карактеристики на форма на зборови, лима на зборот на тековни, претходни и следни зборови, карактеристики на пар на зборови, POS-етикети, префикс и су', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതാണ്. തെറ്റായ വാക്കിന്റെ ക്ലാസ്ഫേഷന്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് സിസ്റ്റത്തിനുള്ള കോണ്\u200dവെഷന്\u200d സംവിധ രണ്ട് വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് നാം പരീക്ഷിച്ചു, വിശേഷിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഗ്രാമത്തിന്റെയും വിശേഷത്തിന്റെയും പരീക്ഷിച്ചു.  For subtask 1 We experimented with two category of word embeddings namely native embeddings and task specific embedding using Word2vec and Glove algorithms.  1. സ്വാഭാവികമായ എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d: നിര്\u200dണ്ണയില്ലാത്ത അപരിചിതമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു 2. ജോലി പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്: വാര്\u200dഡ്2വിക്/ഗ്ലോവ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് മാല്\u200dവെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റിബിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വാക്കുകള സബ്ബസ്റ്റ് 2- ന് വേണ്ടി, മുമ്പ്, 6, മുന്\u200dപ്, അടുത്ത ചിഹ്നങ്ങളും ലേബലുകളും നാം ഉപയോഗിച്ചു, ഇടത്തോ വലതോ വാക്കുകളുടെ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d, വാക്ക് രൂപങ്ങള്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d, മുമ്പും അടുത്ത വാ', 'mt': 'F’din il-ħidma nippreżentaw il-parteċipazzjoni tagħna lil SemEval-2018 Task 8 subtasks 1 & 2 rispettivament. Żviluppajna sistema ta’ Netwerk Newrali ta’ Konveoluzzjoni għall-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentenzi tal-malware (sottomistoqsija 1) u s-sistema Conditional Random Fields għat-tbassir tat-tikketta tat-token tal-malware (sottomistoqsija 2). Esperimentajna b’żewġ strateġiji ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem, settijiet ta’ karatteristiċi u kisbu prestazzjoni kompetittiva fiż-żewġ sottomistoqsijiet. Għas-sottomistoqsija 1 Esperimentajna b’żewġ kategoriji ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem, jiġifieri inkorporazzjonijiet nativi u inkorporazzjoni speċifika għal kompiti bl-użu ta’ algoritmi Word2vec u Glove. 1. Embeddings Native: Il-kliem kollha inklużi dawk mhux magħrufa li huma inizjalizzati b’mod każwali jużaw Embeddings minn mudelli Word2vec/Glove oriġinali. 2. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1. For subtask 2, we used N-grams of size 6, previous, next tokens and labels, features giving disjunctions of words anywhere in the left or right, word shape features, word lemma of current, previous and next words, word-tag pair features, POS tags, prefix and suffixes.', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini kami memperkenalkan ketertarikan kami kepada SemEval-2018 Task 8 subtasks 1 & 2 sesuai. We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2).  We experimented with couple of word embedding strategies, feature sets and achieved competitive performance across the two subtasks.  Untuk subtanya 1 Kami eksperimen dengan dua kategori penyembedding perkataan iaitu penyembedding asli dan penyembedding khusus tugas menggunakan algoritma Word2vec dan Glove. 1. Penjelmaan asli: Semua perkataan termasuk perkataan yang tidak diketahui yang secara rawak digunakan penyelesaian dari model Word2vec/Glove asal. 2. Tugas khusus : Pencampuran dijana oleh algoritma Word2vec/Sarung tangan melatih pada kalimat dari MalwareTextDB Kami jumpa sarung tangan melebihi sisa penyampuran untuk subtask 1. Untuk subtanya 2, kami menggunakan N-gram saiz 6, token dan label terdahulu, seterusnya, ciri-ciri yang memberikan pencegahan perkataan di mana-mana di sebelah kiri atau kanan, ciri-ciri bentuk perkataan, perkataan lemma perkataan semasa, perkataan terdahulu dan berikutnya, ciri-ciri pasangan tag perkataan, tag POS, prefiks dan suffiks.', 'no': 'I dette arbeidet viser vi deltakaren vårt til halvEval-2018 oppgåve 8 subtasker 1 og 2 respectively. Vi utvikla Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2). Vi eksperimenterte med par ord innebygging strategiar, funksjonssett og oppnådd konkurentferdighet over dei to underspørsmålene. For underspørjing 1 Vi eksperimenterte med to kategoriar av ord- innbygging, i namnet lokale innbygging og oppgåve- spesifikke innbygging med Word2vec- og Glove- algoritme. 1. Native innbygging: Alle ord med ukjende som er tilfeldig starta bruk innbygging frå originale Word2vec/Glove-modeller. 2. Oppgåvespesifikk : Innbyggingane er laga ved opplæring av Word2vec/Glove- algoritme på setningar frå MalwareTextDB Vi fann at hjelpelinjene utfører resten av innbyggingar for subtask 1. For underspørjing 2, brukte vi N- gramar med storleik 6, førre, neste teikn og merkelappar. Dette er funksjonar som gir forskjellingar av ord uavhengig i venstre eller høgre, ordforma- funksjonar, ordlemma av gjeldande, førre og neste ord, ord- merkelappar, POS- merkelappar, prefiks og suffiksar.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy prezentujemy nasz udział w podzadaniach SemEval-2018 Task 8 odpowiednio 1,2. Opracowaliśmy system Convolution Neural Network do klasyfikacji zdań złośliwego oprogramowania (podzadanie 1) oraz system warunkowych pól losowych do przewidywania etykiet tokenów złośliwego oprogramowania (podzadanie 2). Eksperymentowaliśmy z kilkoma strategiami osadzania słów, zestawami funkcji i osiągnęliśmy konkurencyjną wydajność w obu podzadaniach. Eksperymentowaliśmy z dwoma kategoriami osadzeń słowowych, a mianowicie z natywnymi osadzeniami i osadzeniami specyficznymi dla zadań przy użyciu algorytmów Word2vec i Glove. 1. Natywne osadzenia: Wszystkie słowa, w tym te nieznane, które są losowo inicjowane, używają osadzeń z oryginalnych modeli Word2vec/Glove. 2. Specyficzne zadanie: osadzenia są generowane przez szkolenie algorytmów Word2vec/Glove na zdaniach z MalwareTextDB Odkryliśmy, że rękawica przewyższa resztę osadzeń dla podzadania 1. W podzadaniu 2 użyliśmy N-gramów rozmiaru 6, poprzednich, następnych tokenów i etykiet, funkcji dających rozłączenia słów w dowolnym miejscu po lewej lub prawej stronie, funkcji kształtu słowa, lemmy słowa bieżącego, poprzedniego i następnego słowa, funkcji pary słów, tagów POS, prefiksu i sufiksów.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын тулд бид SemEval-2018 Task 8-д хуваалцах нь 1 болон 2-г харуулж байна. Бид "Convolution Neural Network System for malware sentence classification" (subtask 1) болон "Convolution Neural Network System for malware token label prediction" (subtask 2) болон "Convolution Neural Network System" бүтээсэн. Бид хоёр давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар үйл ажиллагааг хийсэн. 1-р суурь асуултын хувьд бид Word2vec болон Glove алгоритмыг ашиглан хоёр хэсэг үгийг бий болгож туршиж үзсэн. 1 2. Цаашны тодорхой зүйл: Холбоонууд Word2vec/Glove алгоритмыг MalwareTextDB-ээс өгүүлбэрийн талаар сургалтын үр дүнд гарч ирдэг гэдгийг бид олж мэдсэн. 2-р суралцах нь бид 6, өмнөх, дараагийн тэмдэг болон тэмдэгтийг ашигласан N-грамм, зүүн эсвэл баруун талд хаана ч үгийг хадгалах боломжтой, үг хэлбэрийг, одоогийн, өмнөх, дараагийн үгийг, үг-тэмдэгтийн хоёр хэлбэрүүд, POS тэмдэг, prefix болон суралцах', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo našu sudjelovanje na zadatak 8, odnosno 1 i 2. Razvili smo konvolucioni Neuralni mreža sistem za klasifikaciju kazne za malware (podpitanje 1) i uslovne slučajne polje za predviđanje oznake za malware znakove (podpitanje 2). Eksperimentirali smo sa nekoliko reèi ukljuèujuæi strategija, setovi karakteristika i ostvarili konkurentne funkcije u dva podstakla. Za podpitanje 1 eksperimentirali smo sa dve kategorije uključenih reèi, to je lokalno uključenje i posebno uključenje zadataka koristeći Word2vec i Glove algoritme. 1. Nativne integracije: Sve reči uključujući nepoznate koje su slučajno inicijalizirane koriste integracije iz originalnih modela Word2vec/rukavice. 2. Posebni zadatak : Uključenje je stvoreno od obuke algoritma Word2vec/rukavice o rečenicama iz MalwareTextDB. Pronašli smo da rukavica nadmaže ostatak uključenja za podpitanje 1. Za podpitanje 2, koristili smo N-grame veličine 6, prethodne, sljedeće znakove i etikete, karakteristike koje daju odvajanje rijeèi bilo gde na lijevoj ili desnoj strani, karakteristike reèi oblika, lemu reèi struje, prethodne i sljedeće rijeèi, karakteristike par reèi, oznake POS, prefiks i sufiks.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි අපේ සම්බන්ධතාව සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 8 වැඩේ 1 & 2 විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ මැලවේර් වචන වාර්තාව සඳහා සාමාන්තික ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පද්ධතිය සඳහා මැලවේර් ටොකෙන් ලේබ් ප්\u200dරශ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කළා වචනය සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය, විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සහ සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200d Name 1. ස්ථානික ඇම්බෙඩින්ස්: සියළු වචන් අනතුරු වචන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ අවස්ථාවිත විදිහට පටන්ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය Word2 2. වැඩක් විශේෂය : ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් විශේෂය Word2Vec/Glove ඇල්ගෝරිත්ම් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා MalwareText DB වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා අපි හොයාග 2 වෙනුවෙන්, අපි 6, කලින්, ඊළඟ ටොකන්ස් සහ ලේබල්ස් වල N- ග්\u200dරෑම් භාවිත කරනවා, වමුන් සහ දකුණු වලින් කොහෙවත් වචන වචන වලින් අවස්ථාවක් දෙන්න පුළුවන්, වචන වච', 'so': 'Shaqadan waxaynu u qabanaynaa qayb ka qabsashada SemEval-2018 shaqooyinka 8 si kooban 1 iyo 2. Waxaannu horumarinnay nidaamka Neural Network ee ku saabsan kalluumeysiga cibaadada malware (subtask 1) iyo nidaamka xaaladaha ah ee fudud ee lambarka lambarka ah (subtask 2). Waxaannu ku jirrabnay laba hadal oo qoraal ah oo ku qoran qoraal, tababaro, waxaynu gaadhnay tababar adag oo ku saabsan labada shabakad. Waxaan ku imtixaamaynay laba kooxood oo kalimo ah, kuwaas oo ah waddanka deegaanka iyo shaqo gaar ah oo isticmaalaya Word2vec iyo Glove algorithms. 1. Hadalka asalka ah: Dhammaan erayada aan la aqoonin, kuwaas oo si fudud ah u bilaabay isticmaalka midowyada asalka ah Word2vec/Glove. 2. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1.  For subtask 2, we used N-grams of size 6, previous, next tokens and labels, features giving disjunctions of words anywhere in the left or right, word shape features, word lemma of current, previous and next words, word-tag pair features, POS tags, prefix and suffixes.', 'sv': 'I detta arbete presenterar vi vårt deltagande i SemEval-2018 Task 8 deluppgifter 1 respektive 2. Vi utvecklade Convolution Neural Network system för klassificering av skadlig kod (subaktivitet 1) och Conditional Random Fields system för prediktion av skadlig kod token etikett (subaktivitet 2). Vi experimenterade med några ord inbäddningsstrategier, funktionsuppsättningar och uppnådde konkurrenskraftig prestanda inom de två underaktiviteterna. För subaktivitet 1 Vi experimenterade med två kategorier av ordinbäddningar, nämligen inbyggda inbäddningar och uppgiftsspecifik inbäddning med hjälp av Word2vec och Glove algoritmer. Native Embeddings: Alla ord inklusive de okända som slumpmässigt initieras använder inbäddningar från ursprungliga Word2vec/Glove modeller. Uppgiftsspecifik: Inbäddningarna genereras genom att träna Word2vec/Glove algoritmer på meningar från MalwareTextDB Vi fann att handske överträffar resten av inbäddningar för underaktivitet 1. För underaktivitet 2 använde vi N-gram av storlek 6, tidigare, nästa tokens och etiketter, funktioner som ger avvikelser av ord var som helst i vänster eller höger, ordformfunktioner, ordlemma av nuvarande, föregående och nästa ord, ord-taggpar funktioner, POS-taggar, prefix och suffix.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில் நாம் SemEval-2018 பணியில் பங்கீட்டை காண்பிக்கிறோம். We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2).  இரண்டு வார்த்தைகள் உள்ளடக்கும் திட்டங்கள், பண்புகள் அமைப்புகள், மற்றும் இரண்டு துணை பணிகள் முழுவதும் போராட்டியான செயல் துணை பணி 1 க்கு நாம் இரண்டு வகையான வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்களால் சோதித்தோம். சொல்லின் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் மற்றும் செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட வேர்ட்2வெக்  1. சாதாரண ஏற்றுக்கொள்ளும்: குறிப்பில்லாத த தெரியாத எல்லா வார்த்தைகளும் ஆரம்பிக்கப்பட்ட ஆரம்பிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளில் இரு 2. செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட : உள்ளடக்கங்கள் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது MalwareTextDB வாக்கியங்கள் மீது பயிற்சியில் இருந்து வார்த்தைகளை பயிற்சி செய்து 2vec/Glove algor துணை பணி 2 க்கு, நாம் 6, முந்தைய, அடுத்த சுட்டிகள் மற்றும் சிட்டைகளை பயன்படுத்தி இடது அல்லது வலப்புறத்தில் உள்ள வார்த்தைகளின் பிரிவுகளை கொடுக்கும், சொல் வடிவம் குணங்கள், தற்போதைய சொல்', 'ro': 'În această lucrare vă prezentăm participarea la SemEval-2018 Task 8 subactivități 1 și respectiv 2. Am dezvoltat sistemul Convolution Neural Network pentru clasificarea frazelor malware (subactivitatea 1) și sistemul Condițional Random Fields pentru predicția etichetelor token malware (subactivitatea 2). Am experimentat cu câteva strategii de încorporare a cuvintelor, seturi de caracteristici și am obținut performanțe competitive în cele două subactivități. Pentru subactivitatea 1 Am experimentat două categorii de încorporări de cuvinte și anume încorporări native și încorporări specifice sarcinilor folosind algoritmi Word2vec și Glove. 1. Încorporări native: Toate cuvintele, inclusiv cele necunoscute, care sunt inițializate aleatoriu utilizează încorporări de la modelele originale Word2vec / Glove. 2. Activitate specifică: Încorporările sunt generate de instruirea algoritmilor Word2vec/Glove pe propoziții din MalwareTextDB Am descoperit că mănușa depășește restul încorporărilor pentru subactivitatea 1. Pentru subactivitatea 2, am folosit N-grame de dimensiunea 6, anterioare, următoare jetoane și etichete, caracteristici care oferă disjuncții de cuvinte oriunde în stânga sau dreapta, caracteristici de formă de cuvânt, lemma de cuvinte curente, anterioare și următoare, caracteristici perechi de cuvânt-tag, etichete POS, prefix și sufixe.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کام میں اپنے حصہ کو SemEval-2018 ٹاکس ۸ کے ساتھ 1 & 2 کے ساتھ دکھا دیتے ہیں۔ ہم نے مالویر جماعت کلاسیک کے لئے Convolution Neural Network سیسٹم کو ایجاد کیا اور مالویر ٹاکن لیبل پیش بینی کے لئے Conditional Random Fields سیسٹم (Subask 2) کے لئے۔ ہم نے دوسرے کلمات کے مطابق استراتژیکوں کے ساتھ آزمائش کی اور دوسرے مطابق کے مطابق مطابق مطابق کامیابی کو پہنچایا۔ ہم نے Word2vec اور Glove algorithms کے مطابق دو قسمت کلیفوں کے مطابق آزمائش کی یعنی نائب ایمبڈینگ اور کام مشخص ایمبڈینگ کے مطابق آزمائش کی۔ 1. Native Embeddings: All words including the unknown ones that are randomly initialized use embeddings from original Word2vec/Glove models. 2. ٹاکس خاص : انڈینگ کی تعلیم Word2vec/Glove algorithms کے ذریعے مالwareTextDB کے کلمات پر متوجہ ہوئی ہے ہم نے پایا ہے کہ گلوٹ نے بقیہ ایمبڈینگ 1 کے لئے زیادہ اضافہ کیا ہے. ہم نے 6، پہلے، اگلے ٹوکنز اور لابل کے N-گرم کو استعمال کیا تھا، جو کلمات کو بائیں یا دائیں، کلمات کی فرصت، پہلے اور آگے کے کلمات، کلمات ٹاگن کے جوڑے کی فرصت، POS ٹاگن، اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا', 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi giới thiệu sự tham gia của chúng tôi với Phân tích Semkhai-thẩm 8 subtitle 1....2. Chúng tôi đã phát triển hệ thống dây thần kinh vận chuyển để phân loại phần mềm (phụ đề 1) và hệ thống báo động Ngẫu nhiên báo hiệu phần mềm (phụ đề 2). Chúng tôi đã thử nghiệm với vài chiến lược ghép từ, các bộ cài đặt và đạt được hiệu suất cạnh tranh qua hai mặt phụ đề. Để tìm phần phụ 1 Chúng tôi thí nghiệm với hai loại tổ chức từ: sự nhúng vào nội bộ của bản xứ và sự nhúng vào đặc nhiệm nhiệm bằng thuật toán Word2vec và Glove. 1. Nội địa: Mọi từ, bao gồm cả những từ chưa xác định, những từ được cài nội dung ngẫu nhiên từ các mô hình Word2vec/Glove gốc. 2. Đặc trưng của nhiệm vụ: Sự tác hợp được tạo ra bởi thuật toán Word2vec/Glove các câu câu từ MalwarerTextFB Chúng tôi phát hiện rằng găng hoàn thiện phần còn lại của sự nhúng vào để tìm phần phụ 1. Đối với phần 2, chúng tôi dùng N-grams của kích cỡ 6, trước, những hiệu ứng tiếp theo, các tính năng cung cấp các liên kết của từ ở bất cứ đâu bên trái hay phải, các tính năng dạng từ, từ lemmma của dòng chảy, từ trước và tiếp theo, các tính năng cặp nhãn từ, các thẻ bài có thể, đầu tiên và đủ.', 'uz': "Bu ishda SemEval-2018 Vazifaning 8 vazifalar 1 va 2 xil bilan ishlashimizni taqdim qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Biz ikkita vazifalar bilan bir necha so'zlar bilan bir so'zni tajriba qildik, imkoniyatlar tuzuvchilari va ikkita vazifalar bilan rivojlanishni bajardik. Ushbu vazifa 1 uchun biz natiy emblemlari va vazifani Word2vec va Glove algoritlari yordamida qo'llangan ikkita turli so'zlar bilan imtiyozlashdik. 1. Natija manzillar: Tasodifiy ishga tushirilgan nomaʼlum soʻzlardan hamma so'zlar asl Word2vec/Glove modellaridan foydalaniladi. 2. Vazifa hodisa: Joʻnatuvchilar MalwareTextDB tashkilotlari uchun Word2vec/Glove algoritlarini tahrirlash orqali yaratiladi. Biz maktab 1 uchun hamma narsalarni bajarishini topdik. Ushbu vazifa 2 uchun, biz 6, oldingi, keyingi belgi va belgilardan N- gram oʻlchamidan foydalanamiz, chap yoki oʻng tomondan so'zlarni ajratish imkoniyatlaridan foydalanamiz, joriy va keyingi soʻzning chegarasining imkoniyatlari, soʻzning tag ikki moslamalari, POS taglari, prefiks va suffix.", 'hr': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo našu sudjelovanje u zadatku 8 podataka 1 i 2. Razvili smo konvolucijski Neuralni mrežan sustav za klasifikaciju kazne malware (podpitanje 1) i uvjetni slučajni sistem polja za predviđanje oznake malwarea (podpitanje 2). Eksperimentirali smo s nekoliko riječi uključujući strategije, kompleta karakteristika i postigli konkurentne učinke u dva podstažnika. Za podpitanje 1 eksperimentirali smo s dvije kategorije uključenih riječi, to je lokalna integracija i specifična zadataka uključena s koristom Word2vec i algoritma rukavice. 1. Prirodni uključujući nepoznate riječi koje su slučajno inicijalizirane koriste integracije iz originalnih modela Word2vec/rukavice. 2. Posebni zadatak : Uključenje je proizvođeno vježbama Word2vec/Glove algoritma o rečenicama iz MalwareTextDB-a pronašli smo da rukavica nadmaže ostatak uključenja za podpitanje 1. Za podpitanje 2, koristili smo N-grame veličine 6, prethodne, sljedeće znakove i etikete, karakteristike koje daju odvajanje riječi bilo gdje na lijevoj ili desnoj strani, karakteristike riječi oblika, riječ lime struje, prethodne i sljedeće riječi, karakteristike par riječi, oznake POS, prefiks i sufiks.', 'bg': 'В тази работа представяме участието си в Задача 8 съответно подзадачи 1 и 2. Разработихме система за класификация на изречения от зловреден софтуер (подзадача 1) и система за условни случайни полета за прогнозиране на етикета на зловреден софтуер (подзадача 2). Експериментирахме с няколко стратегии за вграждане на думи, набор от функции и постигнахме конкурентни резултати в двете подзадачи. За подзадача 1 експериментирахме с две категории вграждания на думи, а именно местни вграждания и специфично вграждане на задачи, използвайки алгоритми. Всички думи, включително неизвестните, които са случайно инициализирани, използват вграждания от оригиналните модели. 2.Специфични задачи: Вградванията се генерират чрез обучение на алгоритми на изречения от Установихме, че ръкавицата превъзхожда останалите вграждания за подзадача 1. За подзадача 2 използвахме Н-грамове с размер 6, предишни, следващи символи и етикети, функции, даващи разединения на думи навсякъде в ляво или дясно, функции за форма на дума, дума лема на текущи, предишни и следващи думи, функции за двойка думи-етикети, тагове, префикс и наставки.', 'nl': 'In dit werk presenteren we onze deelname aan SemEval-2018 Taak 8 subtaken 1,2 respectievelijk. We ontwikkelden Convolution Neural Network systeem voor malware zinnenclassificatie (subtaak 1) en Conditional Random Fields systeem voor malware token label voorspelling (subtaak 2). We hebben geëxperimenteerd met een paar woordinbeddingsstrategieën, feature sets en bereikten concurrerende prestaties over de twee subtaken. Voor subtaak 1 We hebben geëxperimenteerd met twee categorieën woord embeddings, namelijk native embeddings en taakspecifieke embedding met behulp van Word2vec en Glove algoritmes. 1. Native Embeddings: Alle woorden, inclusief de onbekende die willekeurig geïnitialiseerd zijn, gebruiken embeddings van originele Word2vec/Glove modellen. 2. Taakspecifiek: De embeddings worden gegenereerd door het trainen van Word2vec/Glove algoritmes op zinnen uit MalwareTextDB We vonden dat handschoen de rest van embeddings voor subtaak 1 overtreft. Voor subtaak 2 gebruikten we N-gram van grootte 6, vorige, volgende tokens en labels, functies die disjunctions van woorden overal links of rechts geven, woordvormfuncties, woordlemma van huidige, vorige en volgende woorden, woord-tag pair features, POS tags, voorvoegsel en achtervoegsels.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini kami memperkenalkan parteċipasi kami ke SemEval-2018 Task 8 subtasks 1 & 2 respectively. We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2).  We experimented with couple of word embedding strategies, feature sets and achieved competitive performance across the two subtasks.  For subtask 1 We experimented with two category of word embeddings namely native embeddings and task specific embedding using Word2vec and Glove algorithms.  1. Native Embeddings: All words including the unknown ones that are randomly initialized use embeddings from original Word2vec/Glove models.  2. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1.  For subtask 2, we used N-grams of size 6, previous, next tokens and labels, features giving disjunctions of words anywhere in the left or right, word shape features, word lemma of current, previous and next words, word-tag pair features, POS tags, prefix and suffixes.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde præsenterer vi vores deltagelse i SemEval-2018 Opgave 8 underopgaver 1 & 2 henholdsvis. Vi udviklede Convolution Neural Network-system til klassificering af malware-sætninger (underopgave 1) og Conditional Random Fields-system til forudsigelse af malware-token-etiket (underopgave 2). Vi eksperimenterede med et par ordindlejringsstrategier, funktionssæt og opnåede konkurrencedygtige resultater på tværs af de to underopgaver. Til underopgave 1 Vi eksperimenterede med to kategorier af ord indlejringer nemlig native indlejringer og opgavespecifik indlejring ved hjælp af Word2vec og Glove algoritmer. Indbyggede indlejringer: Alle ord, herunder de ukendte, der tilfældigt initialiseres, bruger indlejringer fra originale Word2vec/Glove modeller. Opgavespecifikke: Indlejringerne genereres ved at træne Word2vec/Glove algoritmer på sætninger fra MalwareTextDB Vi fandt ud af, at handske overgår resten af indlejringerne for underopgaven 1. Til underopgave 2 brugte vi N-gram af størrelse 6, tidligere, næste tokens og etiketter, funktioner, der giver adskillelser af ord hvor som helst i venstre eller højre side, ordform funktioner, ordlemma af nuværende, forrige og næste ord, ord-tag par funktioner, POS tags, præfiks og suffikser.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit stellen wir unsere Teilnahme an SemEval-2018 Task 8 Teilaufgaben 1,2 vor. Wir entwickelten Convolution Neural Network System für die Klassifizierung von Schadsoftware-Satzen (Subtask 1) und Conditional Random Fields System für Malware Token Label Vorhersage (Subtask 2). Wir experimentierten mit einigen Wort-Einbettungsstrategien, Feature-Sets und erzielten eine wettbewerbsfähige Leistung in den beiden Teilaufgaben. Für Teilaufgabe 1 Wir haben mit zwei Kategorien von Wort-Einbettungen experimentiert, nämlich native Einbettungen und aufgabenspezifische Einbettungen mit Word2vec und Glove Algorithmen. 1. Native Einbettungen: Alle Wörter, einschließlich der unbekannten, die zufällig initialisiert werden, verwenden Einbettungen von originalen Word2vec/Glove-Modellen. 2. Aufgabenspezifisch: Die Einbettungen werden durch Training von Word2vec/Glove Algorithmen auf Sätzen aus MalwareTextDB generiert. Wir fanden heraus, dass Glove die restlichen Einbettungen für Subtask 1 übertrifft. Für Subtask 2 haben wir N-Gramm Größe 6, vorherige, nächste Token und Beschriftungen verwendet, Funktionen, die Trennungen von Wörtern irgendwo links oder rechts geben, Wortformmerkmale, Wortlemma von aktuellen, vorherigen und nächsten Wörtern, Wort-Tag-Paarfunktionen, POS-Tags, Präfix und Suffixe.', 'ko': '이 업무에서 우리가SemEval-18 임무 8자 임무 1과 2에 대한 참여 상황을 소개했다.우리는 악성 소프트웨어 문장 분류에 사용되는 권적신경 네트워크 시스템(하위 작업 1)과 악성 소프트웨어 표기 예측에 사용되는 조건 랜덤 필드 시스템(하위 작업 2)을 개발했다.우리는 몇 개의 단어 삽입 전략, 기능 집합을 시도했고, 이 두 개의 하위 임무에서 경쟁력 있는 성능을 얻었다.하위 작업 1에 대해 우리는Word2vec와 장갑 알고리즘을 사용하여 두 가지 단어의 삽입, 즉 원생 삽입과 작업의 특정 삽입을 실험했다.1. 원본 삽입: 무작위로 초기화된 알 수 없는 단어를 포함한 모든 단어는 원본 Word2vec/Glove 모형에서 삽입됩니다.2. 퀘스트 특정: 삽입은MalwareTextDB의 문장 훈련Word2vec/Glove 알고리즘을 통해 생성됩니다. Glove는 하위 퀘스트 1에서 다른 삽입보다 우수하다는 것을 발견했습니다.하위 작업 2에 대해 우리는 크기가 6인 N-gram, 앞, 뒤의 표기와 라벨, 왼쪽 또는 오른쪽 어느 위치에서 단어 분석의 특징, 단어 형상 특징, 현재, 앞과 뒤의 단어의 단어 인용, 단어 표기가 특징, 단어 표기, 접두사와 접두사를 제시했다.', 'af': 'In hierdie werk stel ons deelnadering aan SemEval-2018 Taak 8 ondersoek 1 en 2 respectively. Ons het Konvolusie Neurale Netwerk stelsel ontwikkel vir malware seting klassifikasie (subtask 1) en Conditional Random Veldsstelsel vir malware token etiket voorskou (subtask 2). Ons het eksperimenteer met paar woorde inbetering strategies, funksie stelle en rekenaardige prestasie oor die twee subtaske. Vir subtvra 1 Ons het eksperimenteer met twee kategorie woord inbêdings, naamlik natuurlike inbêdings en taak spesifieke inbêding deur Word2vec en Glove algoritme te gebruik. 1. Natiewe Inbêding: Alle woorde insluitend die onbekende wat willekeurig geïnisialiseer word gebruik inbêdings van oorspronklike Word2vec/Glove models. 2. Opdrag spesifieke : Die inbêring word genereer deur onderwerp van Word2vec/Glove algoritme op teikene van MalwareTextDB Ons het gevind dat die rukkie uitvoer die res van inbêding vir onderwerp 1. Vir subvraag 2, het ons N- grame van grootte 6, vorige, volgende tekens en etikette gebruik, funksies wat afsluitings van woorde enige plek in die linker of regs gee, woord vorm funksies, woord lemma van huidige, vorige en volgende woorde, woord- etikette paar funksies, POS etikette, voorvoegsel en afsluitings.', 'sq': 'Në këtë punë ne paraqesim pjesëmarrjen tonë në SemEval-2018 Task 8 subtasks 1 & 2 respektivisht. Kemi zhvilluar sistemin e Convolution Neural Network për klasifikimin e fjalëve të gabuara (subtask 1) dhe sistemin Conditional Random Fields për parashikimin e etiketës së token të gabuara (subtask 2). Eksperimentuam me disa strategji të përfshirjes së fjalëve, grupe të veçanta dhe arritëm performancë konkurruese në të dy nëndetyrat. Për nënpyetjen 1 Ne eksperimentuam me dy kategori të përfshirjeve të fjalëve: përfshirje vendase dhe përfshirje specifike të detyrave duke përdorur algoritmet Word2vec dhe Glove. 1. Embeddings native: All words including the unknown ones that are randomly initialized use embeddings from original Word2vec/Glove models. 2. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1.  Për nënpyetjen 2, kemi përdorur N-gram të madhësisë 6, shenjat e mëparshme, të ardhshme dhe etiketat, funksionet që japin shkëputje të fjalëve kudo në të majtë apo djathtë, funksionet e formës së fjalës, fjalën limë të fjalëve aktuale, të mëparshme dhe të ardhshme, funksionet e palës së fjalës-etiketave, etiketat POS, prefiks dhe suffixes.', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما مشارکت خود را به تابع ۲۰۱۸ به طور مستقل ۱ و ۲ نشان می دهیم. ما سیستم شبکه عصبی تغییر دادیم برای کلیسازی جمله\u200cهای malware (زیر سوال ۱) و سیستم زمینه\u200cهای تصادفی شرایط برای پیش\u200cبینی برچسب\u200cهای نشانه\u200cهای malware (زیر سوال ۲). ما با چند کلمه استراتژی\u200cهای پیدا کردن، مجموعه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cها و اجرای مسابقه\u200cای در دو سوت\u200cبازی آزمایش کردیم. برای زیر سوال ۱ ما با دو قسمت کلمه استفاده کردن آزمایش کردیم که به عنوان استفاده از الگوریتم Word2vec و Glove استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ۱. پیوند\u200cبندی\u200cهای طبیعی: تمام کلمات شامل آن\u200cها که ناشناخته شده\u200cاند، به طور تصادفی از مدل\u200cهای اصلی Word2vec/Glove استفاده می\u200cکنند. 2. کار خاصی : انجمن\u200cها توسط آموزش الگوریتم\u200cهای Word2vec/Glove بر جمله\u200cهای MalwareTextDB پیدا کردیم که دستگیری بقیه انجمن\u200cها را برای زیر سوال ۱ انجام می\u200cدهد. برای زیر سوال ۲، ما از N-گرم اندازه ۶، پیشینه، نشانه\u200cهای بعدی و برچسب استفاده کردیم، ویژگی\u200cهایی که به هر جایی در چپ یا راست، ویژگی\u200cهای شکل کلمه، لیما کلمه\u200cهای جاری، کلمه\u200cهای پیشینه و بعدی، ویژگی\u200cهای جفت کلمه\u200cها، نقاشی\u200cهای POS، پیشینه و اثرات.', 'tr': 'Bu işde SemEval-2018 Taýgy 8-nji çykyş 1 we 2-nji çykyşymyzy görkezýäris. Biz malware sözleri klasifikasyon üçin Kötüleşme Neural Network sistemini geliştirdik Bir näçe söz taýýarlama stratejiýasy, özellikler düzümleri we dalaşyklaşyk etkinleşmeler bilen test etdik. 1 1 2. Görevler spesifikaty : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences on MalwareTextDB We found that glove performs over the rest of embeddings for subtask 1. 2 alt soraglamak üçin, 6, öňki, sonraki işaretler we etiketlerden N-gramlaryny ullandyrdyk, söz biçimleri solda we sagda nähili ýerde kesişmelerini aýdyrmak üçin, söz biçimleri, häzirki, öňki we sonraki sözler, söz-tägler çift özellikleri, POS tägleri, öňki we yalğamaları ekleýärler.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii tunatoa ushiriki wetu kwenye kazi za SemEval-2018 kwa asilimia 1 na 2. Tumetengeneza mfumo wa Mtandao wa Habari wa Kujitolea kwa ajili ya kutangaza hukumu mbaya (jukumu la subira 1) na mfumo wa mashamba ya hali ya kawaida kwa ajili ya kutabiri alama ya vifaa vya vibaya (subjuzi 2). Tulijaribu kwa maneno mawili yaliyotengeneza mikakati, vipengenezo na kupata ufanisi wa ushindani katika majukumu haya mawili. Kwa jukumu la subira 1 tulijaribu kwa makundi mawili ya maneno yaliyoandikwa kwa jina la maeneo ya asili na kazi maalum yanayoingia kwa kutumia algorithi za Word2vec na Glove. 1. Mambo ya asili: Hadithi zote ikiwa ni pamoja na wale wasiojulikana ambao kwa mara ya kwanza umeanzishwa kutumia vifaa vinavyoanzishwa kutoka kwenye mifano ya awali ya Word2vec/Glove. 2. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1.  Kwa ujumbe wa ujumbe wa 2, tulitumia vifaa vya N-gram yenye ukubwa wa 6, zilizopita, ishara za baadaye na alama, vipengele vinavyogawanya maneno mahali kushoto au kulia, vipengele vya neno, maneno ya upande wa sasa, maneno yaliyopita na yanayofuata, vipengele viwili vya maneno, viungo vya POS, vifaa vya awali na vifusi.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր մասնակցությունը "ՍեմԵվալ-2018"-ի 8-ի հանձնարարությունը 1 և 2-ի ենթախնդիրները: Մենք զարգացրեցինք հակադարձ նյարդային ցանցի համակարգը սխալ ծրագրի դասությունների դասակարգման համար (ենթահարց 1) և սխալ ծրագրի նյարդային նշանների նախատեսման պայմանավոր պատահական դաշտերի համակարգը (ենթահարց 2). Մենք փորձեցինք մի քանի բառ ներառելու ռազմավարություններով, հատկանիշների համակարգերով և հասանք մրցակցության արդյունքների երկու ենթահարցերում: For subtask 1 We experimented with two category of word embeddings namely native embeddings and task specific embedding using Word2vec and Glove algorithms.  1. Բնական ներգրավումներ. Բոլոր բառերը, ներառյալ անհայտ բառերը, որոնք պատահականորեն սկզբնական են, օգտագործում են Word2vec- ի սկզբնական մոդելների ներգրավումներ: 2. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1.  Երկրորդ ենթահարցի համար մենք օգտագործեցինք N-գրամը 6 չափի, նախորդ, հաջորդ նշաններ և պիտակներ, առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք տալիս են բառերի բաժանմունքներ ձախ կամ աջ կողմում, բառերի ձևի առանձնահատկություններ, ներկայիս, նախորդ և հաջորդ բառերի բառեր, բառերի բառերի բա', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা সেমভাল-২০১৮ পর্যায়ে আমাদের অংশগ্রহণের সামনে উপস্থিত করছি ১ এবং ২ সাবটাকাজ। We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2).  আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি শব্দের বিভিন্ন কৌশল, বৈশিষ্ট্য সেট এবং দুটি সাবটাসের প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদর্শন করেছি। ১ সাব কাজের জন্য আমরা দুটি বিভাগ শব্দের বিভাগে পরীক্ষা করেছিলাম, যার নাম হচ্ছে স্থানীয় বিভাগ এবং কাজের বিশেষ ভাবে উল্লেখ করেছি ১. স্থানীয় বিবরণ: অজানা শব্দের মধ্যে যার মধ্যে রয়েছে তাদের মধ্যে যারা প্রাথমিক ওয়ার্ড২ভেক/গ্লোভ মডেল থেকে ব্যবহার করেছে। ২. কাজের নির্দিষ্ট বিশেষ: মালওয়ারটেক্স্টিডিবি থেকে ওয়ার্ড২ভিক/গ্লোভ অ্যালগোরিদম প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন প্রযুক্তিগুলো তৈরি করা  সাব-কাজ ২ এর জন্য আমরা ৬ গ্রামের আকার, আগের, পরবর্তী চিহ্ন এবং লেবেল ব্যবহার করেছি, বাম অথবা ডানে কোথাও শব্দ বিভক্তির বৈশিষ্ট্য দিয়েছি, শব্দের ফর্ম বৈশিষ্ট্য, বর্তমানের বার্তা লেমা,', 'am': 'በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የስምንት ስራ አካባቢ ስራዎችን 1 እና 2 እናቀርባለን፡፡ We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2).  በሁለቱ ደብዳቤዎች ያሉትን አካባቢ ስርዓት፣ የአፍሪካዊ ስርዓት እና ትግባርትን አግኝተናል፡፡ ለመስኮት 1 እና የአገር አካባቢዎች እና ስራ በተለየ ቃላት በሁለት ክፍሎች ላይ ፈተናነው፡፡ 1. የአካባቢ አቀማመጥ: ሁሉም ቃላት ውስጥ ያልታወቁትን እና ከoriginal Word2vec/Glove models ውስጥ ሆኗል፡፡ 2. ስራው የተለየ: የውይይት መግለጫ ቃላት 2vec/Glove algorithms በማስተማርና በመላዋርቴክስድብ ላይ የተለየ አካላቢዎችን ለመደበቅ አግኝተናል፡፡ ለመስኮት 2፣ የ-ግራም መጠን 6፣ ቀድሞ፣ የሚቀጥለው ምልክቶች እና ምልክቶች፣ ግራ ወይም ቀኝ በማንኛውም ስፍራ ቃላትን ለክፍት እና ቃላት ፊደል ምርጫዎች፣ የአሁኑን ቃላት የእርሱን መለያ፣ የቀድሞውን እና በሚቀጥለው ቃላት፣ ቃል-tag ሁለት ምርጫዎች፣ POS tags, prefix እና suffixes.', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu predstavljamo našu sudjelovanje na zadatak 8, odnosno 1 i 2. Razvili smo konvolucioni Neuralni mrežan sistem za klasifikaciju kazne malvera (podpitanje 1) i uvjetni slučajni sistem polja za predviđanje oznake malvera (podpitanje 2). Eksperimentirali smo sa nekoliko riječi integriranih strategija, kompleta karakteristika i ostvarili konkurentne učinke u dva podstakla. Za podpitanje 1 eksperimentirali smo sa dvije kategorije ugrađenja riječi, to je lokalno ugrađenje i posebno ugrađenje zadataka, koristeći Word2vec i Glove algoritme. 1. Nativne integracije: Sve riječi uključujući nepoznate koje su slučajno inicijalizirane koriste integracije iz originalnih modela Word2vec/rukavice. 2. Posebni zadatak : Uključenje je proizvođeno vježbom algoritma Word2vec/rukavice o rečenicama iz MalwareTextDB. Pronašli smo da rukavica nadmašuje ostatak uključenja za podpitanje 1. Za podpitanje 2, koristili smo N-grame veličine 6, prethodne, sljedeće znakove i etikete, karakteristike koje daju odvajanje riječi bilo gdje na lijevoj ili desnoj strani, karakteristike riječi, lime struje, prethodne i sljedeće riječi, karakteristike par riječi, POS etikete, prefiks i sufiks.', 'az': 'Bu işdə bizim paylaşmamızı SemEval-2018 Task 8 subtaskları 1 və 2 ilə göstəririk. Biz malware sözləri klasifikasyonu üçün Convolution Neural Network sistemini və malware token etiketi tədbirləri üçün Convolution Neural Network sistemini təhsil etdik (subtask 2). Biz bir neçə söz müxtəlif stratejilərlə, özellikləri qurğuları ilə təcrübə etdik və iki dəstədən münafiqli performansı başa düşdük. Subask 1 üçün iki kategoriya söz inbölümü ilə imtahana çəkdik ki, Word2vec və Glove algoritmi vasitəsilə yerli inbölümlər və işlər müəyyən edilir. 1. Təvvəlki İfadələr: Xüsusiyyətli olaraq bilinməyən sözlərdən daxil olunan Word2vec/Glove modellerindən istifadə edilən bütün sözlər istifadə edir. 2. Gözəl məqsədilə : İmzalar Word2vec/Glove algoritmi MalwareTextDB sözlərinin təhsil edilməsi ilə təhsil edilir . Biz gördük ki, əlavə 1 subtask üçün geri qalan inbinglərin üstünə gəlir. İkinci sual üçün, 6, əvvəlki, sonraki möcüzələr və etiketlər, sol və sağda hər yerdə sözlərin xüsusiyyətlərini, söz şəkillərini, ağımdaki, əvvəlki və sonraki sözlərin limmi, söz etiketlərinin çift xüsusiyyətlərini, POS etiketlərini, prefiksini və təsirlərini göstərən növbətlərini kullandıq.', 'et': 'Selles töös tutvustame oma osalust SemEval-2018 ülesande 8 alaülesannetes 1 ja 2 vastavalt. Töötasime välja konvolutsioonivõrgu süsteemi pahavara lausete klassifitseerimiseks (alaülesanne 1) ja tingimuslike juhuslike väljade süsteemi pahavara märgistuse prognoosimiseks (alaülesanne 2). Me katsetasime paari sõna manustamisstrateegiat, funktsioonikomplekti ja saavutasime konkurentsivõimelise tulemuse kahe alamülesande puhul. Alaülesande 1 puhul katsetasime kahte kategooriat sõna manustamist, nimelt kohalikke manustamisi ja ülesandepõhiseid manustamisi Word2vec ja Glove algoritme kasutades. Kõik sõnad, kaasa arvatud tundmatud sõnad, mis on juhuslikult initsialiseeritud, kasutavad manustamist algsetest Word2vec/Glove mudelitest. 2. Ülesandespetsiifiline: manustamised on loodud Word2vec/Glove algoritmide koolitamisel lausete kohta MalwareTextDB Leidsime, et kinnas ületab ülejäänud manustamised alamülesande 1 puhul. Alaülesandeks 2 kasutasime N-gramme suurusega 6, eelmisi, järgmisi märke ja silte, funktsioone, mis annavad sõnade disjunktsioonid vasakul või paremal, sõna kuju funktsioone, praeguste, eelmiste ja järgmiste sõnade sõnalema, sõna-sildi paari funktsioone, POS silte, eesliide ja sufikse.', 'ca': "En aquest treball presentem la nostra participació a SemEval-2018 La tasca 8 subtanya 1 i 2 respectivament. Vam desenvolupar un sistema de Convolution Neural Network per la classificació de frases malware (subpregunta 1) i un sistema Conditional Random Fields per predir etiquetes de fitxes malware (subpregunta 2). Vam experimentar amb un parell d'estratègies d'incorporació de paraules, conjunts de característiques i vam aconseguir un rendiment competitiu en les dues subtaskes. Per a la subterrània 1 Hem experimentat amb dues categories d'incorporacions de paraules, a saber, incorporacions natives i incorporacions específices de tasques utilitzant algoritmes Word2vec i Glove. 1. Incorporacions indígenes: totes les paraules incloent les desconeguts que són inicialitzats aleatòriament utilitzen incorporacions de models Word2vec/Glove originals. 2. Tarefa específica: Les incorporacions són generades treinant algoritmes Word2vec/Glove en frases de MalwareTextDB Hem descobert que el guant supera la resta d'incorporacions de la subtanya 1. Per a la subterrània 2, vam utilitzar N-grams de mida 6, fitxes i etiquetes anteriors, següents, característiques que donaven desjunccions de paraules en qualsevol lloc a l'esquerra o a la dreta, característiques de forma de paraules, limó de paraules actuals, anteriors i següents, característiques de parell de paraules, etiquetes POS, prefix i sufixos.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esittelemme osallistumismme SemEval-2018 Task 8 alatehtäviin 1 ja 2 vastaavasti. Kehitimme Convolution Neural Network -järjestelmän haittaohjelmien lauseiden luokitteluun (alatehtävä 1) ja Conditional Random Fields -järjestelmän haittaohjelmien tunnisteiden ennustamiseen (alatehtävä 2). Kokeilimme muutaman sanan upotusstrategian, ominaisuusjoukon ja saavutimme kilpailukykyisen suorituskyvyn näissä kahdessa alatehtävässä. Alatehtävään 1 Kokeilimme kahta sanaupotustyyppiä eli natiiviupotusta ja tehtäväkohtaista upotusta Word2vec- ja Glove-algoritmeilla. 1. Natiivi upotukset: Kaikki sanat, mukaan lukien tuntemattomat, jotka satunnaisesti alustetaan, käyttävät upotuksia alkuperäisistä Word2vec/Glove malleista. 2. Tehtäväkohtainen: Upotukset luodaan kouluttamalla Word2vec/Glove algoritmeja lauseisiin MalwareTextDB Havaitsimme, että käsine on parempi kuin muut upotukset alatehtävässä 1. Alatehtävään 2 käytimme N-grammaa koosta 6, edellinen, seuraava merkkiä ja etikettejä, ominaisuuksia, jotka antavat disjunktioita sanoista missä tahansa vasemmalla tai oikealla, sanamuodon ominaisuuksia, nykyisen, edellisen ja seuraavan sanan sanalemma, sana-tagiparin ominaisuuksia, POS-tageja, etuliite ja liitteet.', 'cs': 'V této práci představujeme naši účast na SemEval-2018 Task 8 dílčích úkolech 1,2. Vyvinuli jsme systém Convolution Neural Network pro klasifikaci vět malwaru (subttask 1) a systém Conditional Random Fields pro predikci štítků tokenů malwaru (subttask 2). Experimentovali jsme s několika strategiemi vkládání slov, sadami funkcí a dosáhli konkurenčního výkonu napříč dvěma dílčími úkoly. Pro podúkol 1 Experimentovali jsme se dvěma kategoriemi slovních vložení, a to nativními vloženími a úlohově specifickými vloženími pomocí algoritmů Word2vec a Glove. 1. Nativní vložení: Všechna slova včetně neznámých, která jsou náhodně inicializována, používají vložení z originálních modelů Word2vec/Glove. 2. Specifická úloha: Vložení jsou generovány tréninkem algoritmů Word2vec/Glove na větách z MalwareTextDB Zjistili jsme, že rukavice překoná zbytek vložení pro podúkol 1. Pro podúkol 2 jsme použili N-gramy velikosti 6, předchozí, další žetony a štítky, funkce dávající oddělení slov kdekoliv vlevo nebo vpravo, funkce tvaru slova, slovní lemma aktuálního, předchozího a dalšího slova, funkce páru slov-tagů, POS tagy, prefix a přípony.', 'sk': 'V tem delu predstavljamo sodelovanje v podnalogah 1 in 2 SemEval-2018 Task 8. Razvili smo sistem konvolucijskega nevralnega omrežja za klasifikacijo stavkov zlonamerne programske opreme (podnaloga 1) in sistem pogojnih naključnih polj za napovedovanje oznake zlonamerne programske opreme (podnaloga 2). Eksperimentirali smo z nekaj strategijami vključevanja besed, nabori funkcij in dosegli konkurenčno zmogljivost v obeh podnalogah. Za podnalogo 1 smo eksperimentirali z dvema kategorijama vgradnje besed, in sicer z uporabo algoritmov Word2vec in Glove. Vse besede, vključno z neznanimi, ki so naključno inicializirane, uporabljajo vdelave iz originalnih modelov Word2vec/Glove. 2. Specifična naloga: Vgradnje so ustvarjene z usposabljanjem algoritmov Word2vec/Glove na stavkih iz MalwareTextDB Ugotovili smo, da rokavica presega preostale vdelave za podnalogo 1. Za podnalogo 2 smo uporabili N-grame velikosti 6, prejšnje, naslednje žetone in oznake, funkcije, ki dajejo diskriminacije besed kjerkoli na levi ali desni, funkcije oblike besede, besedna lemma trenutnih, prejšnjih in naslednjih besed, funkcije par besed-oznak, POS oznake, predpone in pripone.', 'ha': 'Daga wannan aikin, Munã halatar da shirinmu zuwa shugaban SemEV-2018 Mun buɗa tsarin shaidar ayuka na Kwamfyutan Neural na Kwamfyutan Kwamfyuta wa siffarwa na cire-aiki (sub-aikin 1) da kuma na tsarin Fitlogi na Hanyar Hanyar da Haƙĩƙa wa gabanin ayukan ayuka na misware (sub-aikin 2). Ga jarrabi da wasu kalmõmi biyu masu cikin taskõki, masu tsari, kuma muka sami rabo da tarajani biyu. @ action: button 1. Native Embeddings: All words including the unknown ones that are randomly initialized use embeddings from original Word2vec/Glove models.  2. Taimar aiki na ƙayyade: An ƙididdige masu amfani da word2vc/glave algoritm kan sonar MalwareTextDB Ga sub-aikin 2, mun yi amfani da N-gram ɗin girmar 6, gabanin, cikin alama na ƙarshe, masu gaura da shiryoyin ayuka, masu gaura masu gafukan hagu ko dama, masu tsari ga ƙananar magana, sunan lamma na yanzu, masu gaba da kuma da kalmar dabam, tag biyu masu kallo, tag biyu, prefix da filiki.', 'bo': 'ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་ཞུགས་སྐྱོད་པ་ནི་SemEval-2018 ལས་ཀ་གནང་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་༡ & ༢་ལ་སྟོན་ཡོད། We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2). ངེད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གནད་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་གྱིན་ཡོད། subtask 1 We experimented with two categories of word embeddings namely native embeddings and task specific embedding using Word2vec and Glove algorithms. 1.Native Embeddings: All words including the unknown ones that are randomly initialized use embeddings from original Word2vec/Glove models. 2. Task specific : The embeddings are generated by training Word2vec/Glove algorithms on sentences from MalwareTextDB We found that glove outperforms rest of embeddings for subtask 1. For subtask 2, we used N-grams of size 6, previous, next tokens and labels, features giving disjunctions of words anywhere in the left or right, word shape features, word lemma of current, previous and next words, word-tag pair features, POS tags, prefix and suffixes.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita mengko sampek ning acara sampek ning semebal-2008 task 8 nggawe barang 1 lan 2 responsibno. Two Two politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness 1. 2 For Subquestion 2, we used N-gram of size 6, previous, next token and Label', 'he': 'בעבודה הזו אנו מציגים את השתתפות שלנו לסמיוול-2018 משימה 8 תוקעות 1 & 2 בהתאם. We developed Convolution Neural Network system for malware sentence classification (subtask 1) and Conditional Random Fields system for malware token label prediction (subtask 2).  ניסינו עם מספר אסטרטגיות מילים, תכונות, והשגנו ביצועים תחרותיים בכל שתי השאלות. For subtask 1 We experimented with two category of word embeddings namely native embeddings and task specific embedding using Word2vec and Glove algorithms.  1. קידומים מקומיים: כל המילים כוללות המילים הלא ידועות שמתחילות באופן אקראי משתמשות קידומים ממודלים Word2vec/כפפות מקוריים. 2. משימה ספציפית: ההכניסות יוצרות על ידי אימון אלגוריתמים Word2vec/כפפות על משפטים ממלוואר טקסט DB עבור התשובה 2, השתמשנו N-גרם בגודל 6, קודם, סימנים ובתוויות הבאות, תכונות שמעניקים פיצוצים של מילים בכל מקום בשמאל או ימין, תכונות צורת מילים, מילה לימה של מילים הנוכחיות, קודמות ובאות הבאות, תכונות זוג מילים, תוויות POS, מקדיקס וסופקסים.'}
{'en': 'HCCL at SemEval-2018 Task 8 : An End-to-End System for Sequence Labeling from Cybersecurity Reports', 'ar': 'HCCL في SemEval-2018 المهمة 8: نظام شامل لوضع العلامات على التسلسل من تقارير الأمن السيبراني', 'pt': 'HCCL na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 8: Um sistema de ponta a ponta para rotulagem de sequência de relatórios de segurança cibernética', 'fr': "HCCL au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 8\xa0: Un système de bout en bout pour l'étiquetage des séquences à partir de rapports de cybersécurité", 'es': 'HCCL en la Tarea 8 de SemEval-2018: Un sistema integral para el etiquetado de secuencias a partir de informes de ciberseguridad', 'ja': 'HCCL at SemEval -2018 Task 8: A End - to - End System for Sequence Labeling from Cybersecurity Reports', 'ru': 'HCCL на SemEval-2018 Задача 8: Сквозная система для маркировки последовательностей из отчетов о кибербезопасности', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 8 पर HCCL: साइबर सुरक्षा रिपोर्ट से अनुक्रम लेबलिंग के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड सिस्टम', 'zh': 'HCCL于SemEval-2018事8:网络安全告以序表之端到端', 'ga': 'HCCL ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 8: Córas ó cheann ceann go ceann le haghaidh Lipéadú Seicheamh ó Thuarascálacha Cibearshlándála', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Καθήκον 8: Ένα ολοκληρωμένο σύστημα επισήμανσης ακολουθιών από εκθέσεις κυβερνοασφάλειας', 'hu': 'HCCL a SemEval-2018 8. feladaton: End-to-End rendszer a kiberbiztonsági jelentésekből származó sorozatcímkézéshez', 'kk': 'HCCL 8 тапсырмасының шегінші- 2018 тапсырмасы: Кибер қауіпсіздік туралы мәліметтерден келесі жарлықтау жүйесі', 'it': "HCCL a SemEval-2018 Task 8: Un sistema end-to-end per l'etichettatura di sequenza dai report di sicurezza informatica", 'lt': 'HCCL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: An End-to-End System for Sequence Labeling from Cybersecurity Reports', 'ms': 'HCCL pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Sistem Akhir-ke-Akhir untuk Label Kelajuan dari Laporan Sibersiguri', 'mk': 'ХЦКЛ на SemEval-2018 задача 8: Систем од крај до крај за означување на секвенцијата од извештаите за кибербезбедност', 'mt': 'HCCL f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 8: Sistema ta’ Tmiem sa Tmiem għat-Tikkettar tas-Sekwenza mir-Rapporti dwar iċ-Ċibersigurtà', 'mn': 'HCCL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: An End-to-End System for Sequence Labeling from Cyber Security Reports', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 8: സൈബെര്\u200dസിക്ക് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സെക്കന്\u200dസെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലാബില്\u200d നിന്നും അവസാനിക്കുന്', 'no': 'HCCL ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 8: Ein ende-til-sluttsystem for sekvensetiketting frå sybersecurity Reports', 'pl': 'HCCL na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 8: Kompleksowy system etykietowania sekwencji z raportów cyberbezpieczeństwa', 'sr': 'HCCL na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 8: Sistem kraja do kraja za označavanje sekvence iz izveštaja o sajber sigurnosti', 'ro': 'HCCL la SemEval-2018 Task 8: Un sistem end-to-end pentru etichetarea secvențelor din rapoartele de securitate cibernetică', 'si': 'HCCL at HalfEvel-2018 Job 8: A End-to-End System for sequence Labeling from Cyber Secure Rapporters', 'so': 'HCCL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: An End-to-End System for Sequence Labeling from Cybersecurity Reports', 'sv': 'HCCL på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 8: Ett heltäckande system för sekvensmärkning från cybersäkerhetsrapporter', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018ல் HCCL பணி 8: சைப்பர் பாதுகாப்பு அறிக்கைகளில் இருந்து முடிவிற்கு ஒரு முடிவு- to- முடிவு அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'سیمیEval-2018 ٹاکس 8 میں HCCL: سایر سیکوئنس ریپورٹ سے سیکئنس لابلینگ کے لئے ایک پایان-تا-پایان سیسٹم', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hợp lý tại SemEvl-tê 8: Một hệ thống kết thúc cho nhãn hiệu dãy từ các báo cáo an ninh mạng', 'nl': 'HCCL op SemEval-2018 Taak 8: Een end-to-end systeem voor sequentie labeling uit cybersecurity rapporten', 'hr': 'HCCL na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 8: sustav kraja do kraja za označavanje sekvence iz izvješća o kibersigurnosti', 'da': 'HCCL på SemEval-2018 Opgave 8: Et end-to-end system til sekvensmærkning fra cybersikkerhedsrapporter', 'id': 'HCCL di SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Sebuah Sistem Akhir-Akhir untuk Label Sekuensi dari Laporan Keamanan Sibernetik', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Система от край до край за етикетиране на последователности от доклади за киберсигурност', 'ko': 'HCCL의 SemEval-18 작업 8: 네트워크 보안 보고서 시퀀스 레이블의 끝에서 끝까지의 시스템', 'de': 'HCCL auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 8: Ein End-to-End-System zur Sequenz-Kennzeichnung aus Cybersicherheitsberichten', 'sw': 'HCCL kwenye SemEval-2018 Kazi 8: Mfumo wa mwisho-to-mwisho wa Kufuatilia Taarifa za Usalama wa Mtandao', 'sq': 'HCCL në SemEval-2018 Task 8: An End-to-End System for Sequence Labelling from Cybersecurity Reports', 'fa': 'HCCL در ماموریت ۱۸: سیستم پایان تا پایان برچسب\u200cهای سطح از گزارش\u200cهای محافظت سایبر', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'HCCL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: An End-to-End System for Sequence Labeling from Cybersecurity Reports', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'az': 'HCCL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: A End-to-End System for Sequence Labeling from Cyber Security Reports', 'hy': 'ՀԿԿ-ը 2018-ի կիսահավասարության 8-րդ հանձնարարում. Կիբերանվստահության զեկույցներից ստացված հաջորդականության նշանակման վերջ-վերջ համակարգ', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৮: সাইবার নিরাপত্তা রিপোর্ট থেকে সেকেন্স লেবেলিং এর একটি শেষ-থেকে শেষ সিস্টেম', 'bs': 'HCCL na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 8: sustav kraja do kraja za označavanje sekvence iz izvještaja o sajber sigurnosti', 'ca': 'HCCL a SemEval-2018 Task 8: A End-to-End System for Sequence Labelling from Cybersecurity Reports', 'fi': 'HCCL SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 8: Kattava järjestelmä sarjamerkintöihin kyberturvallisuusraporteista', 'et': 'HCCL SemEval-2018 ülesandel 8: küberturvalisuse aruannete järjekordade märgistamise täielik süsteem', 'cs': 'Úkol 8: End-to-End systém pro sekvenční označování ze zpráv kybernetické bezpečnosti', 'jv': 'HCL at semiinval-2020 task 8: an End-to-End System for Sence Label from Cibersecurity Report', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'sk': 'HCCL na SemEval-2018 naloga 8: celovit sistem za označevanje zaporedja iz poročil o kibernetski varnosti', 'he': 'HCCL ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 8: מערכת סוף-סוף לטביעות רצף מדווחי ביטחון סייבר', 'bo': 'HCCL at SemEval-2018 Task 8: An End-to-End System for Sequence Labeling from Cybersecurity Reports'}
{'en': 'This paper describes HCCL team systems that participated in SemEval 2018 Task 8 : SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP). To solve the problem, our team applied a neural network architecture that benefits from both word and character level representaions automatically, by using combination of Bi-directional LSTM, CNN and CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Our system is truly end-to-end, requiring no feature engineering or data preprocessing, and we ranked 4th in the subtask 1, 7th in the subtask2 and 3rd in the SubTask2-relaxed.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة أنظمة فريق HCCL التي شاركت في SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (الاستخراج الدلالي من تقارير الأمن السيبراني باستخدام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية). لحل المشكلة ، طبق فريقنا بنية شبكة عصبية تستفيد من تمثيلات مستوى الكلمة والحرف تلقائيًا ، باستخدام مزيج من LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه ، و CNN و CRF (Ma and Hovy ، 2016). يعتبر نظامنا حقًا شاملاً ، ولا يتطلب هندسة ميزات أو معالجة مسبقة للبيانات ، وقد احتلنا المرتبة الرابعة في المهمة الفرعية 1 و 7 في المهمة الفرعية 2 والثالث في SubTask2-Relaxed.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit les systèmes d'équipe HCCL qui ont participé à SemEval 2018 Task 8\xa0: SecureNLP (Extraction sémantique à partir de rapports de cybersécurité à l'aide de la PNL). Pour résoudre le problème, notre équipe a appliqué une architecture de réseau neuronal qui bénéficie automatiquement de représentations au niveau des mots et des caractères, en utilisant une combinaison de LSTM bidirectionnel, CNN et CRF (Ma et Hovy, 2016). Notre système est vraiment de bout en bout, ne nécessitant aucune ingénierie des fonctionnalités ni aucun prétraitement des données, et nous nous sommes classés 4e dans la sous-tâche 1, 7e dans la sous-tâche2 et 3e dans la sous-tâche2-assouplie.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve os sistemas da equipe HCCL que participaram da Tarefa 8 do SemEval 2018: SecureNLP (Extração semântica de relatórios de segurança cibernética usando NLP). Para resolver o problema, nossa equipe aplicou uma arquitetura de rede neural que se beneficia de representações em nível de palavra e caractere automaticamente, usando a combinação de LSTM bidirecional, CNN e CRF (Ma e Hovy, 2016). Nosso sistema é realmente de ponta a ponta, não exigindo engenharia de recursos ou pré-processamento de dados, e ficamos em 4º na subtarefa 1, 7º na subtarefa2 e 3º na SubTask2-relaxed.', 'es': 'Este documento describe los sistemas del equipo de HCCL que participaron en la Tarea 8 de SemEval 2018: SecureLP (Extracción semántica de informes de ciberseguridad mediante NLP). Para resolver el problema, nuestro equipo aplicó una arquitectura de red neuronal que se beneficia de las representaciones a nivel de palabras y caracteres automáticamente, mediante el uso de una combinación de LSTM, CNN y CRF bidireccionales (Max and Hovy, 2016). Nuestro sistema es realmente integral, no requiere ingeniería de funciones ni preprocesamiento de datos, y ocupamos el cuarto lugar en la subtarea 1, el séptimo en la subtarea 2 y el tercero en la subtarea 2 relajada.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP （ NLPを使用したサイバーセキュリティレポートからのセマンティック抽出）に参加したHCCLチームシステムについて説明します。この問題を解決するために、私たちのチームは、双方向LSTM、CNN、CRFの組み合わせを使用して、単語レベルと文字レベルの表現の両方から自動的に恩恵を受けるニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを適用しました（ Ma and Hovy, 2016 ）。当社のシステムは本当にエンドツーエンドで、機能エンジニアリングやデータの前処理を必要とせず、サブタスク1で4位、サブタスク2で7位、サブタスク2で3位にランクインしました。', 'zh': '本文引与SemEval 2018务8:SecureNLP(用NLP从网络安全报中取语义)HCCL团队系统。 为此者,吾团队用一神经网络架构,用双向LSTM,CNN与CRF合,自益单词符(MaHovy2016)。 吾之系统真端到端,不须特征工数预处理,吾于子务1中排名第4,于子职2中排名第7,于SubTask2-relaxed中排名第3。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описываются системы команд HCCL, которые участвовали в задаче 8 SemEval 2018: SecureNLP (Семантическое извлечение из отчетов о кибербезопасности с использованием NLP). Чтобы решить эту проблему, наша команда применила архитектуру нейронной сети, которая автоматически извлекает выгоду из представлений на уровне слов и символов, используя комбинацию двунаправленных LSTM, CNN и CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Наша система действительно end-to-end, не требующ никакую конструкцию характеристики или предобработку данных, и мы занимали 4-ое место в подзадаче 1, 7-ое в подзадаче2 и 3-ое в подзадаче2-расслабленной.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर HCCL टीम सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जिसने SemEval 2018 टास्क 8 में भाग लिया: SecureNLP (NLP का उपयोग करके साइबर सुरक्षा रिपोर्ट से शब्दार्थ निष्कर्षण)। समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हमारी टीम ने एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर लागू किया जो द्वि-दिशात्मक एलएसटीएम, सीएनएन और सीआरएफ (मा और होवी, 2016) के संयोजन का उपयोग करके स्वचालित रूप से शब्द और चरित्र स्तर दोनों का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है। हमारी प्रणाली वास्तव में एंड-टू-एंड है, जिसके लिए कोई फीचर इंजीनियरिंग या डेटा प्रीप्रोसेसिंग की आवश्यकता नहीं है, और हम सबटास्क 1 में 4 वें स्थान पर हैं, सबटास्क 2 में 7 वें और सबटास्क 2-रिलैक्स्ड में तीसरे स्थान पर हैं।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chórais foirne HCCL a ghlac páirt i SemEval 2018 Tasc 8: SecureNLP (Sliocht Séimeantach ó thuarascálacha cybersecurity ag baint úsáide as NLP). Chun an fhadhb a réiteach, chuir ár bhfoireann ailtireacht líonra néarach i bhfeidhm a bhaineann leas as léirithe ar leibhéal na bhfocal agus na gcarachtar go huathoibríoch, trí úsáid a bhaint as teaglaim de LSTM Déthreo, CNN agus CRF (Ma agus Hovy, 2016). Tá ár gcóras fíor deireadh le deireadh, agus níl aon ghné-innealtóireacht nó réamhphróiseáil sonraí ag teastáil uaidh, agus chuireamar sa 4ú háit san fhothasc 1, sa 7ú háit san fhothasc2 agus sa 3ú háit san SubTask2-relaxed.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის შესახებ HCCL ჯგუფის სისტემები, რომლებიც SemEval 2018 დაწყებულია 8. დავალება: SecureNLP (სემანტიური გამოყენება კიბერსუფრთხის შესახებ NLP გამოყენებული პრობლემას გარეშე, ჩვენი ჯგუფი გარეშე ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურაცია, რომელიც ორივე სიტყვების და სიტყვების დონეზე ავტომატურად გამოიყენება, რომელიც გამოყენება ორიდარექტიური ჩვენი სისტემა ნამდვილად საკუთარი დასასრულებელია, საკუთარი ინგენერიცია ან მონაცემების პრეპროცესი არ უნდა მოჭირდება, და ჩვენ მეოთხედი საკუთარი 1, 7 საკუთარი SubTask2 და მესამე საკუთარი Sub', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive i sistemi del team HCCL che hanno partecipato a SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Estrazione semantica dai report di sicurezza informatica utilizzando NLP). Per risolvere il problema, il nostro team ha applicato un'architettura di rete neurale che beneficia automaticamente della rappresentazione a livello di parole e caratteri, utilizzando una combinazione di LSTM bidirezionale, CNN e CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Il nostro sistema è davvero end-to-end, non richiede alcuna feature engineering o pre-elaborazione dei dati, e ci siamo classificati 4 ° nella sottomissione 1, 7 ° nella sottomissione 2 e 3 ° nella sottomissione 2-relaxed.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың semiEval тапсырмасына қатысу үшін HCCL топ жүйелерін таңдайды: SecureNLP (NLP қолданылатын цибер қауіпсіздік хабарламаларынан Semantic Extraction). Мәселеді шешу үшін біздің тобымыз сөздер мен таңбалардың екі деңгейінде автоматты түрде қамтамасыз беретін невралдық желінің архитектурасын қолданды. Бұл екі бағытты LSTM, CNN және CRF (Ma және Hovy, 2016). Біздің жүйеміз соңғы уақытта, инженерлік не деректерді алдын- ала өткізу керек болмайды. Біз 1, 7-ші субсұраныстың 1, 3-ші субсұраныстың 4-ші ретінде субсұранысты 2 және 3-ші SubTask2-', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τα συστήματα ομάδας που συμμετείχαν στο έργο 8: Σημματική εξαγωγή από αναφορές κυβερνοασφάλειας χρησιμοποιώντας τη χρήση του προγράμματος. Για την επίλυση του προβλήματος, η ομάδα μας εφάρμοσε μια αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικού δικτύου που επωφελείται από τις αναπαραστάσεις σε επίπεδο λέξεων και χαρακτήρων αυτόματα, χρησιμοποιώντας συνδυασμό αμφίδρομης και αμφίδρομης απεικόνισης (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Το σύστημά μας είναι πραγματικά ολοκληρωμένο, δεν απαιτεί καμία μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών ή προεπεξεργασία δεδομένων, και κατατάξαμε 4η στην δευτερεύουσα εργασία 1, 7η στην δευτερεύουσα εργασία 2 και 3η στην δευτερεύουσα εργασία 2-χαλαρή.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja azokat a HCCL csoportrendszereket, amelyek részt vettek a SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Szemantikus extrakció a kiberbiztonsági jelentésekből NLP használatával). A probléma megoldása érdekében csapatunk olyan neurális hálózati architektúrát alkalmazott, amely mind a szó, mind a karakter szintű reprezentációt automatikusan használja, kétirányú LSTM, CNN és CRF kombinációjával (Ma és Hovy, 2016). Rendszerünk valóban teljes körű, nem igényel funkciótervezést vagy adatfeldolgozást, és a 4. helyezést az 1. részfeladatban, a 7. helyezést a 2. részfeladatban és a 3. helyezést a 2. részfeladatban.', 'mk': 'Овој документ ги опишува системите на тимот на ХЦКЛ кои учествуваа во SemEval 2018 задача 8: Сигурна НЛП (Семантична екстракција од извештаите за киберосигурност користејќи НЛП). За да го решиме проблемот, нашиот тим аплицираше нервна мрежа архитектура која користи од автоматски претставувања на зборови и карактеристички ниво, користејќи комбинација на двоправни LSTM, CNN и CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Нашиот систем навистина е од крај до крај, не бара инженерство или препроцес на податоци, и ние се рангиравме на четвртиот во субпрашањето 1, 7 во субпрашањето 2 и 3 во субзадачата 2 релаксирана.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomos HCCL grupės sistemos, kurios dalyvavo 2018 m. SemEval 8 užduotyje „SecureNLP“ (Semantinė kibernetinio saugumo ataskaitų ekstrakcija naudojant NLP). Siekdama išspręsti šią problem ą, mūsų komanda taikė neurologinio tinklo architektūrą, kuri automatiškai naudinga ir žodžių, ir simbolių lygio atstovavimu, naudojant dvikrypčių LSTM, CNN ir CRF derinį (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Mūsų sistema iš tikrųjų yra nuo pabaigos iki pabaigos, nereikalaujama jokios charakteristikų in žinerijos ar duomenų apdorojimo, ir mes klasifikuojame ketvirtą paklausos 1, 7 paklausos 2 ir 3 paklausos relaxed SubTask2.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistemi tat-tim tal-HCCL li pparteċipaw f’SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Estrazzjoni Semantika mir-rapporti dwar iċ-ċibersigurtà bl-użu tal-NLP). Biex issolvi l-problem a, it-tim tagħna applika arkitettura tan-netwerk newrali li tibbenefika kemm mir-rappreżentazzjonijiet fil-livell tal-kliem kif ukoll tal-karattru awtomatikament, billi uża kombinazzjoni ta’ LSTM Bidirezzjonali, CNN u CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Is-sistema tagħna hija verament minn tarf għal tarf, li ma teħtieġ l-ebda in ġinerija tal-karatteristiċi jew ipproċessar minn qabel tad-dejta, u kklassifikajna r-raba’ fis-sottomistoqsija 1, is-seba’ fis-sottomistoqsija 2 u t-tielet fis-SubTask2 rilassati.', 'ms': 'This paper describes HCCL team systems that participated in SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP).  Untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini, pasukan kami melaksanakan arkitektur rangkaian saraf yang bermanfaat dari kedua-dua perwakilan perkataan dan aras aksara secara automatik, dengan menggunakan kombinasi LSTM, CNN dan CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Sistem kita benar-benar akhir-akhir, tidak memerlukan kecerdasan ciri-ciri atau pemprosesan data, dan kami rank ke-4 dalam subtask 1, ke-7 dalam subtask2 dan ke-3 dalam SubTask2-relaxed.', 'ml': 'This paper describes HCCL team systems that participated in SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP).  പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ടീം പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കും അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ നിലപാടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200d നെറ് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ അവസാനം അവസാനിക്കുന്നതാണ്, പ്രത്യേക എഞ്ചിനിജിനിയർ അല്ലെങ്കിൽ ഡേറ്റാ പ്രൊസിസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യേണ്ട ആവശ്യമില്ല. സബ്ട്', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemele echipei HCCL care au participat la SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Extracție semantică din rapoartele de securitate cibernetică folosind PNL). Pentru a rezolva problema, echipa noastră a aplicat o arhitectură de rețea neurală care beneficiază automat atât de reprezentarea la nivel de cuvânt, cât și de caractere, utilizând combinația de LSTM bidirecțional, CNN și CRF (Ma și Hovy, 2016). Sistemul nostru este cu adevărat end-to-end, nu necesită inginerie de caracteristici sau pre-procesare a datelor, și ne-am clasat pe locul 4 în subactivitatea 1, pe locul 7 în subactivitatea 2 și pe locul 3 în subactivitatea 2 – relaxat.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sisteme ekipe HCCL-a koji su sudjelovali u zadatku 8 iz polovine Evala 2018: SecureNLP (Semantička izvlačenja iz izveštaja kiberbezbednosti koristeći NLP). Da bi rešio problem, naš tim je primjenio neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu koja koristi automatski od predstavljanja riječi i nivoa karaktera, koristeći kombinaciju dvosmjernih LSTM, CNN i CRF (Ma i Hovy, 2016). Naš sistem je zaista kraj do kraja, ne zahteva nikakve funkcije in ženjeringa ili preprocessiranja podataka, a mi smo bili četvrti u podpitanju 1, 7 u podpitanju 2 i 3 u opuštenoj SubTask2.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь SemEval 2018 Task 8-д оролцсон HCCL багийн системийг тайлбарладаг: SecureNLP Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бидний баг нь үг болон хариу дүнгээс автоматаар ашигладаг мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурыг ашиглаж, хоёр давхар LSTM, CNN болон CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016) хоёр давхараас ашигладаг. Бидний систем үнэхээр төгсгөл, төгсгөл байдал болон өгөгдлийн инженер, өгөгдлийн өмнө үйлдвэрлэх шаардлагагүй. Бид SubTask2-ын дотоод 1, 7-р дотоод 4-р асуулт авсан.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver HCCL- gruppesystemet som delta i semiEval 2018 Oppgåve 8: SecureNLP (semiantisk utpakking frå cybersecurity reports using NLP). For å løyse problemet, brukte gruppa vårt ein neuralnettverksarkitektur som nyttar automatisk frå både ordet og teiknveltet representasjonar, ved å bruka kombinasjon av Bi-retning LSTM, CNN og CRF (Ma og Hovy, 2016). Sistemet vårt er verkeleg slutt til slutt, som krev ingen funksjonsengineering eller dataforhandtering, og vi rangerte 4. i subtspørjinga 1, 7. i subtask2 og 3. i SubTask2-relakserte.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano systemy zespołów HCCL, które uczestniczyły w SemEval 2018 Zadanie 8: SecureNLP (Semantyczna ekstrakcja z raportów cyberbezpieczeństwa przy użyciu NLP). Aby rozwiązać problem, nasz zespół zastosował architekturę sieci neuronowej, która automatycznie korzysta z reprezentacji na poziomie słowa i znaków, wykorzystując kombinację dwukierunkowych LSTM, CNN i CRF (Ma i Hovy, 2016). Nasz system jest naprawdę kompleksowy, nie wymaga żadnej inżynierii funkcji ani wstępnego przetwarzania danych, a my zajęliśmy czwartą w podzadaniu 1, siódmą w podzadania2 i trzecią w podzadania2-relaksowanym.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තේ HCCL කණ්ඩායම පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා සම්වේල් 2018 වැඩ 8: SecureNLP ප්\u200dරශ්නය විසඳන්න, අපේ කණ්ඩායමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ වචනය සහ අක්ෂර ස්ථානයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජන අපේ පද්ධතිය ඇත්තටම අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් ඉන්ජිනේරියාවක් නැති දත්ත ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාසයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ, අපි 4වෙනි අවසානය 1, 7වෙනි Sub-', 'ur': 'This paper describes HCCL team systems that participated in SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP). مسئلہ حل کرنے کے لئے، ہماری تیم نے ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک معماری استعمال کی جو کلمات اور کریٹر سطح کے معاملہ سے اپنے ساتھ فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے، اس کے ذریعہ دو دقیق LSTM, CNN اور CRF (ماہ اور هووی، 2016) کی ترکیب کے مطابق۔ ہمارا سیستم بالکل پایان پایان ہے، کوئی فرصت انجینرینگ یا ڈیٹا پرپرپروسینگ کی ضرورت نہیں ہے، اور ہم نے Subask 1, 7th Subask2 اور 3th SubTask2-relaxed میں چوتھا رنگ کیا ہے.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaa ku qoran kooxda HCCL ee ka qayb galay SemEval 2018 Shaqada 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from reports of security cybernetka using NLP). Sida uu dhibaatada u xalliyo, kooxdayagu waxay isticmaaleen xarunta shabakadda neurada ah oo faa’iido ka hela labada hadal iyo heerka saqafka, si automatic ah ugu isticmaalaya kombinadda Bi-directional LSTM, CNN iyo CRF (Ma iyo Hovy, 2016). Sida runta ah nidaamkayagu waa dhammaadkii ugu dambaysay, oo aan u baahnayn injiilka ama baaraandegista macluumaadka, waxaana ku saxeynay shabakadda 1, todobaad ee subshalka 2 iyo saddexaad ee Subsk2.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver HCCL-teamsystem som deltog i SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP). För att lösa problemet tillämpade vårt team en neural nätverksarkitektur som drar nytta av både ord- och teckenivårepresentationer automatiskt, genom att använda en kombination av dubbelriktad LSTM, CNN och CRF (Ma och Hovy, 2016). Vårt system är verkligen end-to-end, kräver ingen feature engineering eller databehandling, och vi rankade 4:e i underuppgiften 1, 7:e i underuppgiften 2 och 3:e i underuppgiften 2-avslappnad.', 'ta': 'This paper describes HCCL team systems that participated in SemEval 2018 Task 8: Security NLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP). பிரச்சனையை தீர்க்க எங்கள் குழு ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கம் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது, அது வார்த்தையும் எழுத்து மட்டத்திலும் இருந்தும் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, தான எங்கள் அமைப்பு உண்மையில் முடிவு உள்ளது, சிறப்பு பொறியியல் அல்லது தரவு முன்செயல் தேவைப்படாது, துணை பணியில் 1, 7வது உப பணியில் உள்ள உப்பணி2 மற்றும் 3வது மு', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval 2018 Vazifa 8: Xavfsizlik NLP (NLP yordamida Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports) ga murojaat qiladi. Muammo haqida xabar qilish uchun, guruhimizning bir so'z va harf darajadagi narsalarni avtomatik ravishda foydalanadi. Bi-direktoral LSTM, CNN va CRF (Ma va Hovy 2016) bilan birga birlashtirishdan foydalanadi. Biz tizimmiz haqiqatgina oxiriga tugadi, muhandiya yoki maʼlumot oldini boshqarish kerak emas, va biz tub vazifani 1, 7 chi va 3- chi tub vazifalarda olib tashlangan.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống của đội HCL đã tham gia vào nhiệm vụ SemEvl 2008: SecureNLP (Phân tích hóa từ báo cáo an ninh mạng sử dụng NLP). Để giải quyết vấn đề, đội của chúng tôi sử dụng một cấu trúc mạng thần kinh có lợi dụng cả từ và mực đại diện tự động, bằng cách sử dụng sự kết hợp của LSD hai hướng, CNN và CRF (Ma và Hoy, Hoy, 206). Hệ thống của chúng tôi thực sự kết thúc, yêu cầu không có tính kỹ thuật hay xử lý dữ liệu, và chúng tôi xếp hạng bốn trong phần thứ tư 1, bảy trong phần phụ đề và thứ ba trong phần giảm thanh SubTask2-thư giãn.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver HCCL-teamsystemer, der deltog i SemEval 2018 Opgave 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP). For at løse problemet anvendte vores team en neural netværksarkitektur, der automatisk drager fordel af både ord- og tegneniveau repræsentationer ved hjælp af en kombination af to-retningsbestemt LSTM, CNN og CRF (Ma og Hovy, 2016). Vores system er virkelig end-to-end og kræver ingen feature engineering eller data forbehandling, og vi rangerede 4. i underopgaven 1., 7. i underopgaven 2. og 3. i underopgaven 2. afslappet.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft HCCL-teamsystemen die deelnamen aan SemEval 2018 Taak 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports with NLP). Om het probleem op te lossen, paste ons team een neurale netwerkarchitectuur toe die automatisch profiteert van zowel woord- als karakterniveau representaties, door gebruik te maken van een combinatie van Bi-directionele LSTM, CNN en CRF (Ma en Hovy, 2016). Ons systeem is echt end-to-end, vereist geen feature engineering of data preprocessing, en we werden 4e in de subtaak 1, 7e in de subtask2 en 3e in de SubTask2-ontspannen.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustave tima HCCL-a koji su sudjelovali u zadatku 8 iz polovine Evala 2018: SecureNLP (Semantička izvlačenja iz izvješća o sajber sigurnosti koristeći NLP). Za rješavanje problem a, naš tim je primijenio neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu koja koristi automatski od predstavljanja riječi i razine karaktera, koristeći kombinaciju dvosmjerne LSTM, CNN i CRF (Ma i Hovy, 2016). Naš sustav je stvarno kraj do kraja, ne zahtijevajući nikakve funkcije in ženjerstva ili preobradu podataka, a mi smo četvrti u podpitanju 1, 7 u podpitanju 2 i 3 u opuštenoj SubTask2.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системите на екипа, участвали в задача 8: Семантично извличане от доклади за киберсигурност с помощта на НЛП. За решаване на проблема нашият екип приложи архитектура на невронната мрежа, която се възползва от представянето на думи и символи автоматично, като използва комбинация от двупосочни ЛСТМ, CNN и КРФ (Ма и Хови, 2016). Нашата система е наистина от край до край, не изисква инженеринг на функции или предварителна обработка на данни, и ние се класирахме на 4-то място в подзадача 1, 7-мо в подзадача 2 и 3-то в подзадача 2.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem tim HCCL yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval 2018 Tugas 8: SecureNLP (Ekstraksi Semantik dari laporan keamanan cyber menggunakan NLP). Untuk memecahkan masalah ini, tim kami menerapkan arsitektur jaringan saraf yang berguna dari represensi kata dan karakter secara otomatis, dengan menggunakan kombinasi LSTM bidireksi, CNN dan CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Sistem kita benar-benar akhir-akhir, tidak memerlukan teknik fitur atau pemroses data, dan kami rank ke-4 dalam subtask 1, ke-7 dalam subtask2 dan ke-3 dalam SubTask2-rileks.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt HCCL-Teamsysteme, die an SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity reports using NLP) teilgenommen haben. Um das Problem zu lösen, wandte unser Team eine neuronale Netzwerkarchitektur an, die automatisch von Wort- und Zeichendarstellungen profitiert, indem die Kombination aus bidirektionalem LSTM, CNN und CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016) verwendet wurde. Unser System ist wirklich End-to-End, erfordert kein Feature Engineering oder Datenvorverarbeitung, und wir belegten Platz vier in der Teilaufgabe 1, Siebte in der Teilaufgabe2 und Dritte in der Teilaufgabe2-entspannt.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa timu ya HCCL ambao walishiriki katika kazi ya SemEval 2018: Usalama wa NLP (Kutengwa kwa ajili ya taarifa za usalama wa mtandaoni kwa kutumia NLP). Ili kutatua tatizo hilo, timu yetu ilitumia ujenzi wa mtandao wa neurali unaotufaika kutoka kwa wawili wa maneno na kiwango cha wahusika, kwa kutumia muunganiko wa LSTM, CNN na CRF (Ma na Hovy, 2016). Mfumo wetu ni mwisho wa mwisho kabisa, unahitaji hakuna utoaji wa uhandisi au utaratibu wa taarifa, na tulikuwa na rangi ya nne katika jukumu la 1, 7 katika pembe za mitandao ya 2 na tatu katika Tamko la Kusini.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم تیم HCCL را توصیف می\u200cکند که با استفاده از NLP شرکت می\u200cکنند در کار ۱۸: SecureNLP. برای حل این مشکل، تیم ما یک معماری شبکه عصبی که به طور خودکار از نمایش کلمات و سطح شخصیت استفاده می\u200cکند، با استفاده از ترکیب LSTM، CNN و CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016) استفاده می\u200cکند. سیستم ما واقعاً پایان و پایان است، که نیازی به مهندسی یا پیش پردازش داده\u200cای ندارد، و ما چهارمین درجه در پایان\u200cپرس ۱، ۷م در پایان\u200cپرس ۲ و سوم در پایان\u200cپرداز ۲ راحت شدیم.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz HCCL topar sistemalary SemEval 2018 Taýgy 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP) hasaplaýar. Meseläni çözmek üçin, biziň toparymyz hem söz we karakterler derejesinden bir arhitektura geçirildi, 2-yönlik LSTM, CNN we CRF (Ma we Hovy, 2016) bilen birleşmelerini ulanarak öz-özüne mümkin etdi. Biziň sistemimiz hakykatdanam soňunda bolan, hiç hili özellikler in ženjeriýa ýa veri öňe işlemek gerek däldir. Biz Subask 1, 7-nji subtask2 we 3-nji SubTask2-de seredeli däldir.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemet e ekipit të HCCL që morën pjesë në SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Extraction Semantic from cybersecurity reports using NLP). Për të zgjidhur problemin, ekipi ynë aplikoi një arkitekturë rrjeti nervor që përfiton nga përfaqësimet e nivelit të fjalës dhe karakterit automatikisht, duke përdorur kombinimin e LSTM-së dy-drejtuese, CNN dhe CRF (Ma dhe Hovy, 2016). Sistemi ynë është me të vërtetë nga fundi në fund, që nuk kërkon inxhinieri apo përgatitje të të dhënave, dhe ne renditëm të katërtin në nënpyetjen 1, të shtatën në nënpyetjen 2 dhe të tretën në SubTask2 të qetësuar.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ስራ 8: የደህንነት NLP (የሴሜንቲክ ውጭ ከሳብሬር ደህንነት ሪፖርት የተጠቃሚ የኤክሲል የቴምቨል 2018 ስርዓት ተግባር የሆኑት HCCL ቴም ሲሞክራዎችን ይናገራል፡፡ ጉዳዩን ለመፈጸም፣ የቡድን ደብዳቤ መረብ መሠረት የተጠቃሚ የቃላት እና የሥርዓት ደረጃዎች ለራሳቸው የሚጠቅመውን የባሕላዊ መረብ አካባቢ አካባቢ፣ CNN እና CRF (MA እና Hovy 2016) በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ ስርዓታችን የፍጻሜ መጨረሻ ነው፣ የፊደል ኢንጂንጂንተር ወይም የዳታ ፕሮግራም አይፈልግም፡፡ በመስኮቱ 1፣ ሰባተኛውና ሦስተኛው በSubTask2 ታርፋለች፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf HCCL-span stelsels wat in SemEval 2018 taak 8 gedeel het: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP). Om die probleem te los, het ons span 'n neurale netwerk-arkitektuur aangepas wat voordeel van beide woord en karaktervlak voorstellings outomaties deur gebruik van kombinasie van Bi-rigting LSTM, CNN en CRF (Ma en Hovy, 2016). Ons stelsel is regtig einde-tot-einde, nodig geen funksie in ženiering of data voorprosessering, en ons het 4de in die subvraag 1, 7de in die subtask2 en 3de in die SubTask2-relakseer rangeer.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը նկարագրում է ՀԿԿԼ թիմի համակարգերը, որոնք մասնակցել են 2018 թվականի "Սեմենտիկ ապահովության" 8-ի "Անվտանգ" գործընթացում: Խնդիրը լուծելու համար մեր թիմը կիրառեց նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություն, որը օգտագործում է բառերի և հերոսների մակարդակի առանձնահատուկ ներկայացումները, օգտագործելով երկուղղությամբ LSMT-ի, CNN-ի և ԿՌՖ-ի համադրումը (MA և Հովի, 2016 Մեր համակարգը իսկապես վերջ-վերջ է, չի պահանջում որևէ հատկանիշների ճարտարագիտություն կամ տվյալների նախամշակում, և մենք 4-րդ դասակարգում ենք 1, 7-րդ դասակարգում 2-րդ և 3-րդ դասակարգում 2-րդ դասակարգում:', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে এইচসিসিএল টিম ব্যবস্থা বর্ণনা করেছে যা সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে: নিরাপত্তা এনএলপি (এনএলপি ব্যবহার করে সাইবার নিরা এই সমস্যার সমাধানের জন্য আমাদের দল একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো প্রয়োগ করেছে যা উভয় শব্দ এবং চরিত্রের স্তরের প্রতিনিধিত্বের সুবিধা প্রদান করেছে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে  আমাদের সিস্টেম সত্যিই শেষ হয়ে গেছে, কোন বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রকৌশল বা তথ্য প্রক্রিয়ার দরকার নেই, এবং আমরা সাবটাস্ক ২ এবং তৃতীয় বিষয়টিতে সাবটাস্কো২-এ ৪', 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2018 임무 8:SecureNLP(NLP를 사용하여 네트워크 안전 보고서에서 의미를 추출)에 참여하는 HCCL 팀 시스템을 묘사한다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리 팀은 양방향 LSTM, CNN, CRF(Ma와 Hovy, 2016)의 조합을 사용하여 단어와 문자 등급의 표시에 자동으로 이익을 얻는 신경 네트워크 구조를 채택했다.우리의 시스템은 진정한 단말기부터 단말기까지 특징 공학이나 데이터 예처리가 필요하지 않다. 우리는 하위 임무 1에서 4위, 하위 임무 2에서 7위, 하위 임무 2에서 3위를 차지한다.', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt 2018-ci SemEval Task 8: SecureNLP (NLP vasit…ôsil…ô sajber t…ôhl√ľk…ôsizlik raportlarńĪndan Semantic Extraction) iŇütirak ed…ôn HCCL takńĪm sisteml…ôrini t…ôsbit edir. Bu problemi √ß…ôkm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, bizim ekibimiz iki y√∂n…ôlli LSTM, CNN v…ô CRF (Ma v…ô Hovy, 2016) il…ô birl…ôŇüdirilm…ôkl…ô h…ôr s√∂z v…ô karakter s…ôviyy…ôsind…ôn fayda ver…ôn n√∂ral Ňü…ôb…ôk…ô arhitektarńĪnńĪ istifad…ô etdi. Sistemimiz h…ôqiq…ôt…ôn sona q…ôd…ôr sona q…ôd…ôr, he√ß bir √∂zellik in Ňĺenjeri v…ô m…ôlumatlarńĪn …ôvv…ôlc…ô iŇül…ôm…ôsi lazńĪm deyildir. Biz Subtask 2-nin 4-ind…ô, 7-ind…ô Subtask 2-in v…ô 3-ind…ô s…ôf-s…ôf √ß…ôkdik.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu els sistemes d'equip del HCCL que van participar en SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from cybersecurity reports using NLP). Per resoldre el problem a, el nostre equip va aplicar una arquitectura de xarxa neural que beneficia automàticament de representacions tant de paraules com de caràcters, utilitzant una combinació de LSTM bidireccional, CNN i CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016). El nostre sistema és realment de final a final, no requereix enginyeria de característiques ni preprocessió de dades, i ens vam classificar al quart de la subterrània 1, al sétimde de la subterrània2 i al tercer de la SubTask2 relaxada.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje týmové systémy HCCL, které se podílely na SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Sémantic Extraction from kybersecurity reports with NLP). K vyřešení problému použil náš tým architekturu neuronové sítě, která automaticky využívá reprezentace slova i znaků, pomocí kombinace obousměrných LSTM, CNN a CRF (Ma a Hovy, 2016). Náš systém je skutečně end-to-end, nevyžaduje žádné funkční inženýrství nebo předzpracování dat, a my jsme se umístili čtvrté v dílčím úkolu 1, sedmé v dílčím úkolu 2 a třetí v SubTask2-relaxed.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse HCCL meeskonnasüsteeme, mis osalesid SemEval 2018 ülesandes 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity reports using NLP). Probleemi lahendamiseks rakendas meie meeskond automaatselt neurovõrgu arhitektuuri, mis saab kasu nii sõna- kui märgitasandi esitustest, kasutades kahesuunaliste LSTM, CNN ja CRF-ide kombinatsiooni (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Meie süsteem on tõeliselt otsast otsa-otsa, mis ei vaja funktsioonide projekteerimist ega andmete eeltöötlust ning me saime alaülesande 1. alamülesande, alaülesande 2. ja alaülesande 2. alamülesande kolmanda koha.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sisteme ekipe HCCL-a koji su sudjelovali u zadatku 8 iz polovice 2018: SecureNLP (Semantička izvlačenja iz izvješća o sajber sigurnosti koristeći NLP). Da bi riješili problem, naš tim je primijenio neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu koja koristi automatski od predstavljanja riječi i nivoa karaktera, koristeći kombinaciju dvosmjerne LSTM, CNN i CRF (Ma i Hovy, 2016). Naš sistem je stvarno kraj do kraja, ne zahtijevajući nikakve funkcije in ženjeringa ili preprocessiranje podataka, a mi smo bili četvrti u podpitanju 1, 7 u podpitanju 2 i 3 u opuštenoj SubTask2.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan HCCL-tiimijärjestelmiä, jotka osallistuivat SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity reports using NLP). Ongelman ratkaisemiseksi tiimimme sovelsi neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuria, joka hyötyy sekä sana- että merkkitason esittämisestä automaattisesti käyttämällä kaksisuuntaisia LSTM-, CNN- ja CRF-yhdistelmiä (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Järjestelmämme on todella kokonaisvaltainen eikä vaadi ominaisuuksien suunnittelua tai tietojen esikäsittelyä, ja sijoittuimme neljänneksi alatehtävässä 1, seitsemänneksi alatehtävässä 2 ja kolmanneksi alatehtävässä 2 rennosti.', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah sing rambarang kelompok nggawe HCL mungkun sistem sing wis diputara nang seminval 2008 task 8: Security NLP (semanti extract nang sabersecurity report nguwe NLP). Ngawe ngubah perbudhakan langgar sampeyan, ekip nambah akeh architecture netejer sing dumadhil karo kelas lan sampeyan caratar kang sampeyan nggawe automatik, Ngawe ngubah sampeyan liyane bi-directial LTT M, MT lan CIF (ma lan Hove, 2011). Sistem dhéwé iso mulai end-to-end, njuk dianggap perusahaan in ênjering apa data antar-perusahaan, lan dhéwé uga basa 4th ning acara basa 1, 7 ning acara supasak2 lan 3 ning Subtask2-suarané.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר מערכות צוות HCCL שהשתתפו בסימוול 2018 משימה 8: SecureNLP To solve the problem, our team applied a neural network architecture that benefits from both word and character level representaions automatically, by using combination of Bi-directional LSTM, CNN and CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016).  המערכת שלנו היא באמת סוף-סוף, לא דורשת הנדסה של תכונות או מערכת נתונים, והדרגנו את הרביעית בתא השאלה 1, השביעית בתא השאלה 2 ושלישית בתא המשימה 2 להירגע.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana tsarin HCCL na'urar jama'a waɗanda suka yi shirin na SemEV 2018 Tafiyar 8: Safe NLP (Samantic Extraction daga Rapport za'a Nautin NLP). To solar wa fitina, team na amfani da tsarin tarakiki na neural wanda ke amfani da su daga maganar da daraja na rubutu farat ɗaya, da kuma ya yi amfani da koma da koma-Directive LSSM, CNN da CRF (Ma and Hovie, 2016). Ga gaskiyarmu na ƙara, ba ta buƙata wani abinci na masu iya amfani da shi ba, kuma ba mu raba wata huɗu a cikin abun aikin 1, 7 na cikin subtask2 da na uku a cikin SubTask2 na fara.", 'sk': 'V tem članku so opisani sistemi ekipe HCCL, ki so sodelovali v nalogi 8 SemEval 2018: SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from kibernetske varnosti reports using NLP). Za rešitev problema je naša ekipa samodejno uporabila arhitekturo nevronskega omrežja, ki ima koristi od predstavitev besedne in znakovne ravni, z uporabo kombinacije dvosmernih LSTM, CNN in CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016). Naš sistem je resnično od konca do konca, ne zahteva nobenega inženiringa funkcij ali predobdelave podatkov, zato smo se uvrstili na 4. mesto v 1. podnalogi, 7. mesto v 2. podnalogi in 3. mesto v 2. podnalogi.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་HCCL དྲ་རྒྱའི་མ་ལག་གི་དོན་ལ་SemEval 2018 Task 8: SecureNLP དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་མོས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར། ང་ཚོའི་དབང་ཆ་གིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་ཡིག་འབྲུ་མཐུད་ཚད་གཉིས་ལས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ Bi- Our system is really end-to-end, requiring no feature engineering or data preprocessing, and we ranked 4th in the subtask 1, 7th in the subtask2 and 3rd in the SubTask2-relaxed.'}
{'en': 'UMBC at SemEval-2018 Task 8 : Understanding Text about Malware', 'ar': 'UMBC في SemEval-2018 المهمة 8: فهم النص حول البرامج الضارة', 'fr': 'UMBC à SemeVal-2018 Tâche 8\xa0: Comprendre le texte sur les logiciels malveillants', 'es': 'UMBC en SemEval-2018 Tarea 8: Entender el texto sobre malware', 'pt': 'UMBC na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 8: Entendendo o texto sobre malware', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク8のUMBC ：マルウェアに関するテキストの理解', 'zh': 'UMBC在SemEval-2018务8:知恶意软件之本', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 8 पर UMBC: मैलवेयर के बारे में पाठ को समझना', 'ru': 'UMBC на SemEval-2018 Задача 8: Понимание текста о вредоносном ПО', 'ga': 'UMBC ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 8: Téacs faoi Mhalearraí a Thuiscint', 'hu': 'UMBC a SemEval-2018 8. feladat: A rosszindulatú programokról szóló szöveg megértése', 'ka': 'UMBC SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 8: Malware-ის ტექსტის შესახებ', 'el': 'Εργασία 8: Κατανόηση κειμένου σχετικά με κακόβουλο λογισμικό', 'kk': 'UMBC жарым- 2018 тапсырмасы 8: Malware туралы мәтін түсініп', 'it': 'UMBC al SemEval-2018 Task 8: Comprendere il testo sui malware', 'lt': '8 užduotis: suprasti tekstą apie blogąją įrangą', 'mk': 'УМБЦ на SemEval-2018 задача 8: Разбирање на текстот за Malware', 'ml': 'സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലി 8: മാല്\u200dവെയര്\u200d കുറിച്ചുള്ള പദാവലി മനസ്സിലാക്കുക', 'mn': 'UMBC SemEval-2018 Task 8: Malware-ын тухай текст ойлгох', 'ms': 'UMBC pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Memahami Teks mengenai Malware', 'mt': 'UMBC f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 8: Il-fehim tat-test dwar il-Malware', 'no': 'UMBC på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 8: Forståking tekst om Malware', 'pl': 'UMBC na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 8: Zrozumienie tekstu o złośliwym oprogramowaniu', 'ro': 'UMBC la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 8: Înțelegerea textului despre malware', 'sr': 'UMBC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 8: razumevanje teksta o malware', 'si': 'UMBC at semeval-2018 Job 8: Understanding Text on Malware', 'so': 'UMBC at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Understanding Text about Malware', 'sv': 'UMBC på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 8: Förstå text om skadlig programvara', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 8: Malware பற்றிய உரையை புரிந்து கொள்ளும்', 'ur': 'UMBC مرکز ۲۰۱۸ ٹاکس ۸ میں: مالویر کے بارے میں متوجہ ہونے کی', 'uz': 'Vazifani 8: Malware haqida understandingText about Malware', 'vi': 'UMBC at SemEvl-208 Task 8: Hiểu được văn bản về Malware', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Разбиране на текста за зловредния софтуер', 'hr': 'UMBC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 8: razumijevanje teksta o malverama', 'nl': 'UMBC op SemEval-2018 Taak 8: Tekst begrijpen over Malware', 'da': 'UMBC på SemEval-2018 Opgave 8: Forståelse af tekst om malware', 'fa': 'UMBC در ماموریت ۲۰۱۸: متوجه کردن متن درباره مالواری', 'id': 'UMBC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Memahami Teks tentang Malware', 'ko': 'UMBC SemEval-18 작업 8: 악성 소프트웨어 텍스트 이해', 'tr': 'UMBC at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Understanding Text about Malware', 'de': 'UMBC bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 8: Text über Malware verstehen', 'sw': 'UMBC katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 8: Kuelewa Maandishi kuhusu Malware', 'af': 'UMBC by SemEval-2018 Taak 8: Verstaan Teks oor Malware', 'sq': 'UMBC në SemEval-2018 Task 8: Understanding Text about Malware', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'hy': 'ՕՄԲԿ-ը, 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի 8-րդ հանձնարարում. Մալվարժեքի մասին տեքստի հասկանալը', 'ca': 'UMBC a SemEval-2018 tasca 8: Entendre el text sobre malware', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৮-এ UMBC: ম্যালওয়্যার সম্পর্কে লেখা বুঝতে পারে', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Malware haqqında məktub anlamaq', 'bs': 'UMBC na semiEval-2018 Task 8: razumijevanje teksta o malverama', 'cs': 'UMBC na SemEval-2018 Úkol 8: Porozumění textu o malwaru', 'et': 'UMBC SemEval-2018 ülesanne 8: pahavara teksti mõistmine', 'fi': 'UMBC SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 8: Haittaohjelmien tekstin ymmärtäminen', 'jv': 'UTM nang semebal-2008 task 8: Tulungi Kemerdekaan barang maliwari', 'ha': 'Taimar 8: Underline Text about Malware', 'sk': 'UMBC na SemEval-2018 Naloga 8: Razumevanje besedila o zlonamerni programski opremi', 'he': 'UMBC ב SemEval-2018 משימה 8: להבין טקסט על Malware', 'bo': 'UMBC SemEval-2018 Task 8 : Malware སྐོར་གྱི་ཡིག་གེ་རྟོགས་བཞག་པ'}
{'en': 'We describe the systems developed by the UMBC team for 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing). We participated in three of the sub-tasks : (1) classifying sentences as being relevant or irrelevant to malware, (2) predicting token labels for sentences, and (4) predicting attribute labels from the Malware Attribute Enumeration and Characterization vocabulary for defining malware characteristics. We achieve F1 score of 50.34/18.0 (dev / test), 22.23 (test-data), and 31.98 (test-data) for Task1, Task2 and Task2 respectively. We also make our cybersecurity embeddings publicly available at.http://bit.ly/cyber2vec.\n    ', 'ar': 'نحن نصف الأنظمة التي طورها فريق UMBC لـ 2018 SemEval Task 8 ، SecureNLP (الاستخراج الدلالي من CybersecUrity REports باستخدام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية). شاركنا في ثلاث من المهام الفرعية: (1) تصنيف الجمل على أنها ذات صلة أو غير ذات صلة بالبرامج الضارة ، (2) توقع تسميات الرموز المميزة للجمل ، و (4) توقع تسميات السمات من مفردات تعداد سمات البرامج الضارة وتوصيفها لتعريف البرامج الضارة مميزات. لقد حققنا درجة F1 من 50.34 / 18.0 (dev / test) و 22.23 (test-data) و 31.98 (test-data) لـ Task1 و Task2 و Task2 على التوالي. كما نجعل حفلات الزفاف الخاصة بالأمن السيبراني متاحة للجمهور على <http://bit.ly/cyber2vec>.', 'es': 'Describimos los sistemas desarrollados por el equipo de UMBC para la Tarea 8 de SemEval 2018, SecureLP (Extracción semántica de informes de ciberseguridad mediante procesamiento de lenguaje natural). Participamos en tres de las subtareas: (1) clasificar las oraciones como relevantes o irrelevantes para el malware, (2) predecir etiquetas de token para oraciones y (4) predecir etiquetas de atributos a partir del vocabulario de enumeración y caracterización de atributos de malware para definir las características del malware. Logramos una puntuación F1 de 50,34/18,0 (desarrollo/prueba), 22,23 (datos de prueba) y 31,98 (datos de prueba) para la Tarea1, la Tarea2 y la Tarea2, respectivamente. También hacemos que nuestras incorporaciones de ciberseguridad estén disponibles públicamente en < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'fr': "Nous décrivons les systèmes développés par l'équipe UMBC pour 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Extraction sémantique à partir de rapports de cybersécurité utilisant le traitement du langage naturel). Nous avons participé à trois des sous-tâches\xa0: (1) classer les phrases comme étant pertinentes ou non pertinentes pour les logiciels malveillants, (2) prévoir les étiquettes de jetons pour les phrases et (4) prédire les étiquettes d'attributs à partir du vocabulaire Malware Attribute Enumeration and Characterization pour définir les caractéristiques des malwares. Nous obtenons un score F1 de 50,34/18,0 (développ/test), 22,23 (données de test) et 31,98 (données de test) pour Task1, Task2 et Task2 respectivement. Nous mettons également nos intégrations de cybersécurité à la disposition du public à l'adresse < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.", 'pt': 'Descrevemos os sistemas desenvolvidos pela equipe UMBC para 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing). Participamos de três das subtarefas: (1) classificar sentenças como relevantes ou irrelevantes para malware, (2) prever rótulos de token para sentenças e (4) prever rótulos de atributo do vocabulário Malware Attribute Enumeration and Characterization para definir malware características. Alcançamos a pontuação F1 de 50,34/18,0 (desenvolvimento/teste), 22,23 (dados de teste) e 31,98 (dados de teste) para Task1, Task2 e Task2, respectivamente. Também disponibilizamos publicamente nossas incorporações de segurança cibernética em <http://bit.ly/cyber2vec>.', 'ja': 'UMBCチームが2018 SemEval Task 8 SecureNLP （ Natural Language Processingを使用したCybersecUrity REportsからのセマンティック抽出）のために開発したシステムについて説明します。次の3つのサブタスクに参加しました。（ 1 ）文をマルウェアに関連するまたは関連しないものとして分類する、（ 2 ）文のトークンラベルを予測する、（ 4 ）マルウェアの特徴を定義するためのマルウェア属性列挙および特徴付けボキャブラリーから属性ラベルを予測する。私たちは、タスク1、タスク2、およびタスク2のF 1スコア50.34/18.0 （開発/テスト）、22.23 （テストデータ）、および31.98 （テストデータ）をそれぞれ達成します。また、でサイバーセキュリティの埋め込みを公開してい<http://bit.ly/cyber2vec>ます。', 'zh': '述UMBC团队为2018 SemEval Task 8,SecureNLP(用自然语言从CybersecUrity REports中取语义)发之统。 予与其三子:(1) 分句为恶意软件不相关,(2) 占句之令牌表,及 (4) 从恶意软件枚举表征词汇表中占属性标签,以定义恶意软件特征。 其于 Task1、Task2 、 Task2,余 F1 分为 50.34/18.0(发/试)、22.23(测试数据)、31.98(测试数据)。 <http://bit.ly/cyber2vec>明供网络安全嵌。', 'hi': 'हम 2018 SemEval कार्य 8, SecureNLP (प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण का उपयोग कर CybersecUrity REports से शब्दार्थ निष्कर्षण) के लिए UMBC टीम द्वारा विकसित प्रणालियों का वर्णन करते हैं। हमने तीन उप-कार्यों में भाग लिया: (1) मैलवेयर के लिए प्रासंगिक या अप्रासंगिक होने के रूप में वाक्यों को वर्गीकृत करना, (2) वाक्यों के लिए टोकन लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करना, और (4) मैलवेयर विशेषताओं को परिभाषित करने के लिए मैलवेयर एट्रिब्यूट गणन और लक्षण वर्णन शब्दावली से विशेषता लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करना। हम क्रमशः कार्य 1, Task2 और Task2 के लिए 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), और 31.98 (test-data) का F1 स्कोर प्राप्त करते हैं। हम अपने साइबर सुरक्षा एम्बेडिंग को सार्वजनिक रूप से <http://bit.ly/cyber2vec> पर उपलब्ध कराते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы описываем системы, разработанные командой UMBC для задачи 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Семантическое извлечение из CybersecUrity Reports с использованием обработки естественного языка). Мы участвовали в трех подзадачах: (1) классификация предложений как релевантных или не имеющих отношения к вредоносному ПО, (2) прогнозирование меток токенов для предложений и (4) прогнозирование меток атрибутов из словаря атрибутов и характеристик вредоносного ПО для определения характеристик вредоносного ПО. Мы получаем оценку F1 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data) и 31.98 (test-data) для Task1, Task2 и Task2 соответственно. Мы также делаем наши вложения в кибербезопасность общедоступными по адресу<http://bit.ly/cyber2vec>.', 'ga': "Déanaimid cur síos ar na córais a d'fhorbair foireann UMBC le haghaidh Tasc SemEval 8 2018, SecureNLP (Sliocht Séimeantach ó Thuarascálacha CybersecUrity ag baint úsáide as Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha). Ghlacamar páirt i dtrí cinn de na fo-thascanna: (1) abairtí a rangú mar abairtí ábhartha nó nach mbaineann le hábhar mailíseach, (2) lipéid chomharthaíochta a thuar le haghaidh abairtí, agus (4) lipéid aitreabúide a thuar ó stór focal Áirimh agus Tréithrithe Malware chun malware a shainiú. tréithe. Bainimid amach scór F1 de 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (sonraí tástála), agus 31.98 (sonraí tástála) do Thasc1, Tasc2 agus Tasc2 faoi seach. Cuirimid ár leabaithe cibearshlándála ar fáil go poiblí freisin ag <http://bit.ly/cyber2vec>.", 'el': 'Περιγράφουμε τα συστήματα που ανέπτυξε η ομάδα του για την 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP. Συμμετείχαμε σε τρεις από τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες: (1) ταξινόμηση των προτάσεων ως σχετικές ή άσχετες με κακόβουλο λογισμικό, (2) πρόβλεψη ετικετών συμβολαίων για προτάσεις και (4) πρόβλεψη ετικετών χαρακτηριστικών από το λεξιλόγιο Καταμέτρηση και Χαρακτηρισμός χαρακτηριστικών κακόβουλου λογισμικού για τον καθορισμό χαρακτηριστικών κακόβουλου λογισμικού. Επιτυγχάνουμε βαθμολογία 50.34/18.0 (ανάπτυξη/δοκιμή), 22.23 (δοκιμή-δεδομένα), και 31.98 (δοκιμή-δεδομένα) για Task1, Task2 και Task2 αντίστοιχα. Κάνουμε επίσης τις ενσωματώσεις μας στον κυβερνοχώρο διαθέσιμες δημόσια στο < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'hu': 'Az UMBC csapata által 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Szemantikus extrakció a kiberbiztonsági újraportokból a természetes nyelv feldolgozásával) fejlesztett rendszereket ismertetjük. Az alfeladatok közül három részt vettünk: (1) mondatok besorolása releváns vagy irreleváns a rosszindulatú programok számára, (2) token címkék előrejelzése a mondatokhoz, és (4) attribútum címkék előrejelzése a rosszindulatú programok tulajdonságainak meghatározására. Az F1 pontszámot 50,34/18,0 (fejlesztés/teszt), 22,23 (tesztadatok), 31,98 (tesztadatok) érjük el Task1, Task2 és Task2 esetében. Kiberbiztonsági beágyazásainkat is nyilvánosan elérhetővé tesszük < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'ka': '2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing). ჩვენ სამუშაობის სამუშაობით დავამწევეთ: (1) წარმოდგენების კლასიფიკაცია როგორც მუშაობელია ან მუშაობელია მუშაობელია, 2) წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენები, და (4) წარმოდგენების F1 წერტილი 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data) და 31.98 (test-data) ყველაფერი 1, Task2 და Task2. ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენი საიბერ-სიკვდილის შესაძლებლობად გავაკეთებთ http://bit.ly/cyber2vec - ეა.', 'kk': 'Біз 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (CybersecUrity REports) командасынан жасалған жүйелерді таңдаймыз. Біз төменгі тапсырмалардың үш жағдайда қатынасыз келді: (1) мәліметтерге қатынасыз немесе қатынасыз болатын сөздерді классификациялау, (2) мәліметтердің белгілерін таңдау, және (4) Malware аттрибуттардың атрибутты мәліметтерді анықтау үшін атрибу Біз F1 нәтижесін 50,34/18,0 (dev/test), 22,23 (test-data) және 31,98 (test-data) тапсырма1, Task2 және тапсырма2 үшін жеткіземіз. Сонымен қатар, сайттың қауіпсіздігін көпшілікті қолдануға болады. http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'it': 'Descriviamo i sistemi sviluppati dal team UMBC per il 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Estrazione semantica da Cybersecurity REports utilizzando Natural Language Processing). Abbiamo partecipato a tre delle sottoattività: (1) classificare le frasi come pertinenti o irrilevanti per il malware, (2) predire le etichette dei token per le frasi e (4) predire le etichette degli attributi dal vocabolario Enumeration e Characterization Attribute Malware per definire le caratteristiche del malware. Otteniamo un punteggio F1 di 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data) e 31.98 (test-data) rispettivamente per Task1, Task2 e Task2. Rendiamo inoltre disponibili pubblicamente i nostri embedding di sicurezza informatica su < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'mk': 'Ние ги опишуваме системите развиени од тимот на УМБЦ за 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Семантична екстракција од CybersecUrity REports користејќи природен јазик процес). We participated in three of the sub-tasks: (1) classifying sentences as being relevant or irrelevant to malware, (2) predicting token labels for sentences, and (4) predicting attribute labels from the Malware Attribute Enumeration and Characterization vocabulary for defining malware characteristics.  We achieve F1 score of 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), and 31.98 (test-data) for Task1, Task2 and Task2 respectively.  Ние, исто така, ги обезбедуваме нашите интеграции за кибер-безбедност јавно на < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'ms': 'Kami menggambarkan sistem yang dikembangkan oleh pasukan UMBC untuk 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP. Kami berpartisipasi dalam tiga sub-tugas: (1) mengklasifikasikan kalimat sebagai berkaitan atau tidak berkaitan dengan malware, (2) meramalkan label token untuk kalimat, dan (4) meramalkan label atribut dari vokbulari Nombor Atribut Malware dan Karakterisasi untuk menentukan karakteristik malware. Kita mencapai skor F1 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (data ujian), dan 31.98 (data ujian) untuk Task1, Task2 dan Task2 respectively. Kami juga membuat penerbangan cyber keselamatan kami tersedia secara umum di < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'ml': '2018 സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d ടാസ്ക് 8, സെക്യൂരിഎന്\u200dഎല്\u200dപി (സെമാന്റിക് എക്സ്ട്രെക്ട്രേക്ഷന്\u200d സൈബെര്\u200dസെക്രേക്ടിറ്റി റിപോര്\u200dട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപാധികളില്\u200d മൂന്നില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു: (1) വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നതോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അപരിചിതമായതോ എന്ന വിധികള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നു, (2) വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ബോക്കല്\u200d ലേ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നത് 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (പരീക്ഷണവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d), 31.98 (പരീക്ഷണവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d) ടാസ്ക്1, ടാസ്ക്2, ടാസ്ക്2. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സൈബെര്\u200dസിക്കേറിയ സംരക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധമാക്കുന്നു < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'mn': 'Бид 2018 оны SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (CybersecUrity REports-ээс Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing) багийн хөгжүүлсэн системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид гурван даалгаварт оролцсон: (1) өгүүлбэрийг зөвхөн зөвхөн хамааралтай эсвэл хамааралтай гэдгийг ангилалдаг, (2) өгүүлбэрийн тэмдэгтийн тэмдэгтийг таамаглаж, мөн (4) Malware Attribute Enumeration, Characterization үгийг зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн тодорхойлж чаддаг. Бид F1 оноо 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), 31.98 (test-data) нь Task1, Task2, Task2 болон Task2-2-ийн оноо гаргадаг. Мөн бид сайтын аюулгүй байдлыг олон нийтэд ашиглаж чадна. http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'no': 'Vi skildrar systemene utvikla av UMBC-gruppa for 2018 semiEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing). Vi delta i tre av underoppgåvene: (1) klassifiserer setningar som er relevante eller uavhengige til malvare, (2) forhåndsvising av merkelapper for setningar, og (4) forhåndsvising av attributtmerkelapper frå ordboka for Malvare-attributtnummerering og teikningar for å definera malvare-karakteristikk. Vi oppnår F1- poeng med 50,34/18,0 (dev/test), 22,23 (test-data) og 31,98 (test-data) for oppgåve1, oppgåve2 og oppgåve2. Vi gjer også cybersikkerhetsbedringane våre tilgjengelege på < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'pl': 'Opisujemy systemy opracowane przez zespół UMBC dla 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports with Natural Language Processing). Uczestniczyliśmy w trzech podzadaniach: (1) klasyfikowaniu zdań jako istotnych lub nieistotnych dla złośliwego oprogramowania, (2) przewidywaniu etykiet tokenów dla zdań oraz (4) przewidywaniu etykiet atrybutów ze słownictwa liczby atrybutów malware i charakteryzacji w celu definiowania cech złośliwego oprogramowania. Osiągamy wynik F1 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (dane testowe) i 31.98 (dane testowe) odpowiednio dla Task1, Task2 i Task2. Udostępniamy również nasze osadzenia cyberbezpieczeństwa publicznie pod adresem < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'ro': 'Descriem sistemele dezvoltate de echipa UMBC pentru 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing). Am participat la trei dintre subsarcini: (1) clasificarea propozițiilor ca fiind relevante sau irelevante pentru malware, (2) predicția etichetelor token pentru propoziții și (4) predicția etichetelor atributelor din vocabularul Enumeration Attribute și Caracterizare Malware pentru definirea caracteristicilor malware. Obținem scorul F1 de 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-date) și 31.98 (test-date) pentru Task1, Task2 și Task2 respectiv. De asemenea, facem publice încorporările noastre de securitate cibernetică la < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'lt': 'Aprašome UMBC grupės 2018 m. SemEval Task 8 (SecureNLP) sukurtas sistemas. Dalyvavome trijose subužduotyse: 1) klasifikuojami sakiniai kaip svarbūs arba nerelevantūs blogai programai, 2) numatomi ženklų ženklai sakiniams ir 4) numatomi požymių ženklai iš blogai programai skirtų požymių skaičiavimo ir charakterizavimo žodyno apibrėžiant blogai programai būdingas savybes. We achieve F1 score of 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), and 31.98 (test-data) for Task1, Task2 and Task2 respectively.  We also make our cybersecurity embeddings publicly available at < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'sr': 'Opi拧emo sisteme koje je UMBC tim razvio za 2018. SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semanti膷na izvla膷enja iz kiberskuritetskih izvla膷enja s prirodnim jezikom). 校褔邪褋褌懈谢懈 褋屑芯 褍 褌褉懈 锌芯写蟹邪写邪褔邪: (1) 泻谢邪褋懈褎懈泻邪褑懈褬褍 褉械褔械薪懈褑邪 泻邪芯 胁邪卸薪械 懈谢懈 薪械胁邪卸薪械 薪邪 薪械胁褉械写薪芯谐 锌褉芯懈蟹胁芯写褋褌胁邪, (2) 锌褉械写褋泻邪蟹褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褯械 蟹薪邪褔泻械 蟹邪 褉械褔械薪懈褬械 懈 (4) 锌褉械写褋泻邪蟹褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褬褍褯械 邪褌褉懈斜褍褌薪械 蟹薪邪褔泻械 懈蟹 褉械褔薪懈泻 Posti啪emo rezultat F1 od 50,34/18,0 (dev/test), 22,23 (test-data), i 31,98 (test-data) za Task1, Task2 i Task2. Tako膽er 膷inimo na拧u sajber sigurnosnu integraciju javno dostupnim na < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'si': 'අපි පද්ධති විශ්වාස කරන්නේ UMBC කණ්ඩායමේ 2018 සෙම්වේල් වැඩ 8, SecureNLP (සයිබර්ස්කුරිට් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා සෙම්පැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳ අපි සබ්-කාර්ය තුන්දෙනුවෙන් භාවිත කරනවා: (1) ක්\u200dරියාසිකරණ වචනය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් නැති වෙනුවෙන්, (2) ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ටොකෙන් ලේබල් වලින්, සහ (4) ක්\u200d අපි 50.34/18.0 (dev/testing), 22.23 (testing-data), and 31.98 (testing-data) for Job1, Job2 and Job2. අපි අපේ සයිබර්ස් වලට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'so': 'Waxaan qoraynaa nidaamka kooxda UMBC ee 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using the Processing of Language Natural). Waxaannu ka qeybqaadanay saddex ka mid ah shuqullada hoose: (1) qeyb-qabsashada hadallada ku saabsan ama aan u baahnayn lambarka, 2) waxaynu ka sii sheegaynaa calaamadaha calaamadaha garsooridda, iyo (4) calaamada gaarka ah oo laga sii sheegayo hadalka xarunta macaamiisha iyo xarafka lagu qorayo aqoonsiga qalabka. Waxaynu gaadhnaa scoro F1 ah oo u eg 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (imtixaanka) iyo 31.98 (imtixaanka) shaqo 1, shaqo 2 iyo shaqo 2. Sidoo kale waxaynu ogeysiinnaa badbaadada shabakadda http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'sv': 'Vi beskriver de system som utvecklats av UMBC-teamet för 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing). Vi deltog i tre av underuppgifterna: (1) klassificera meningar som relevanta eller irrelevanta för skadlig kod, (2) förutsäga token etiketter för meningar och (4) förutsäga attributetiketter från Malware Attribute Enumeration och Characterization ordförråd för att definiera skadlig kod egenskaper. Vi uppnår F1 poäng på 50,34/18,0 (dev/test), 22,23 (testdata) och 31,98 (testdata) för Task1, Task2 respektive Task2. Vi gör även våra cybersäkerhetsinbäddningar offentligt tillgängliga på < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'ur': 'ہم نے ان سیستموں کو توصیح دیتے ہیں جنہیں UMBC تیم نے 2018 کے لئے سیم Eval Task 8، SecureNLP (سائبرسکوریٹ ریپورٹ سے سیم انتقال) کی۔ ہم نے تین سوب-ٹاکس میں شرکت کی: (1) کلاسیوں کو مالویر کے معاملہ یا غیر معاملہ کے طور پر کلاسیوں کا تقریبا کیا، 2) کلاسیوں کے معاملہ میں ٹاکن لیبل کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے، اور (4) مالویر آبریٹ آبریٹ آبریٹ آبریٹ آبریٹ آبریٹ آبریٹ آبریٹ اور ہم 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data) اور 31.98 (test-data) کے لئے تاسک1, Task2 اور Task2 کے لئے پیدا کرتے ہیں. ہم نے اپنے سایر سیبری امنیت کے مطابق ظاہر طور پر موجود بنایا ہے۔ http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'ta': 'நாம் 2018 செம்வால் பணி 8, பாதுகாப்பான NLP (சைப்பர் செயலிலிருந்து செமாண்டிக் வெளியேற்றம் செய்யும் அமைப்புகளை விவரிக்கிறோம் இயல்பான மொழ நாங்கள் துணை பணிகளில் மூன்று குறிப்பாக பங்கிடப்பட்டோம்: நாங்கள் செயல்1, பணி2 மற்றும் பணிக்கு F1 புள்ளியை பெறுகிறோம். இப்பொழுது நாம் < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'mt': 'We describe the systems developed by the UMBC team for 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing).  Parteċipajna fi tlieta mis-sottokompiti: (1) il-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentenzi bħala rilevanti jew irrelevanti għall-malware, (2) it-tbassir tat-tikketti tat-tokens għas-sentenzi, u (4) it-tbassir tat-tikketti tal-attributi mill-vokabulari tal-Enumerazzjoni tal-Attributi tal-Malware u l-Karatterizzazzjoni għad-definizzjoni tal-karatteristiċi tal-malware. We achieve F1 score of 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), and 31.98 (test-data) for Task1, Task2 and Task2 respectively.  Aħna nagħmlu wkoll l-inkorporazzjonijiet tagħna taċ-ċibersigurtà disponibbli pubblikament fuq < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'uz': "Biz 2018 SemEval Vazifa 8, Xavfsizlik NLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Procession) yaratilgan UMBC Team yaratilgan tizimni tahmil qilamiz. Biz tub vazifalarga uchta ta ta'limga ega boʻlgan: 1) dasturga bogʻliq yoki muhim boʻlgan so'zlarni boshqarish mumkin, (2) bir so'zlar uchun tugmalar belgini koʻrsatish, va (4) Malware hisobotini Hisoblash va Characterization xizmatlarini aniqlash uchun moslama belgini koʻrsatish. We achieve F1 score of 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), and 31.98 (test-data) for Task1, Task2 and Task2 respectively.  Biz elektron tarmoqning xavfsizlarimizni o'zgartiradimiz http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống phát triển bởi đội UMBC cho Buổi Điều tra Tinh Phòng 8, SecureNchọc (Semantic Rút ra từ Cyber tiết kiệm khi sử dụng Bảo quản Ngôn ngữ tự nhiên). Chúng tôi đã tham gia ba nhiệm vụ: 1) phân loại câu câu là liên quan hoặc không liên quan tới phần mềm, 2) dự đoán nhãn biểu tượng cho câu câu câu, và (4) định giá định các nhãn thuộc tính từ Từ máy đo ký xuống côn trùng và ký tự dành cho việc xác định các đặc trưng phần mềm mềm mềm. Chúng tôi đạt điểm F1 của 50.34/18 Chúng tôi cũng công bố những sự nhúng tay an ninh mạng của chúng tôi http://bit.ly/cyber2vec -̀.', 'da': 'Vi beskriver de systemer, som UMBC-teamet har udviklet til 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing). Vi deltog i tre af underopgaverne: (1) klassificering af sætninger som relevante eller irrelevante for malware, (2) forudsigelse af token etiketter for sætninger og (4) forudsigelse af attributetiketter fra Malware Attribute Enumeration og Karakterisering ordforråd til definition af malware egenskaber. Vi opnår F1 score på 50,34/18,0 (dev/test), 22,23 (test-data) og 31,98 (test-data) for henholdsvis Task1, Task2 og Task2. Vi gør også vores cybersikkerhedsindlejringer offentligt tilgængelige på < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'de': 'Wir beschreiben die vom UMBC-Team für 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing) entwickelten Systeme. Wir beteiligten uns an drei Teilaufgaben: (1) Klassifizierung von Sätzen als relevant oder irrelevant für Malware, (2) Vorhersage von Token-Labels für Sätze und (4) Vorhersage von Attributlabels aus dem Malware-Attribut-Enumeration und Characterization Vokabular zur Definition von Malware-Eigenschaften. Wir erzielen F1-Punkte von 50.34/18.0 (Entwicklung/Test), 22.23 (Testdaten) und 31.98 (Testdaten) für Task1, Task2 und Task2. Wir stellen unsere Cybersecurity-Einbettungen auch öffentlich zur Verfügung unter < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'nl': 'We beschrijven de systemen ontwikkeld door het UMBC team voor 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing). We hebben deelgenomen aan drie van de deeltaken: (1) het classificeren van zinnen als relevant of irrelevant voor malware, (2) het voorspellen van tokenlabels voor zinnen, en (4) het voorspellen van attributenlabels uit de Malware Attribute Enumeration en Characterization woordenschat voor het definiëren van malwarekenmerken. We bereiken F1 score van 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), en 31.98 (test-data) voor respectievelijk Task1, Task2 en Task2. We maken onze cybersecurity embeddings ook openbaar beschikbaar op < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'hr': 'Opišemo sustave koje je UMBC tim razvio za 2018. SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantička izvlačenja iz CybersecUrity REportova s prirodnim jezikom). Učestvovali smo u tri podzadatka: 1) klasifikacija rečenica kao relevantna ili neovisna na malver, 2) predviđanja etiketa znakova za rečenice, i 4) predviđanja etiketa atributa iz proračuna i karakterizacije pripadnika malwarea za definiranje karakteristika malwarea. Postajemo rezultat F1 od 50,34/18,0 (dev/test), 22,23 (test-data) i 31,98 (test-data) za zadatak 1, zadatak 2 i zadatak 2. Također ćemo javno raspoložiti naše sajber sigurnosti na < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'bg': 'Описваме системите, разработени от екипа на УМБК за 2018 г. Задача 8, Семантично извличане от киберсекюрити РЕпорти с използване на естествен език). Участвахме в три от подзадачите: (1) класифициране на изреченията като подходящи или неуместни за зловреден софтуер, (2) прогнозиране на етикети на символи за изречения и (4) прогнозиране на етикети на атрибути от речника за броене и характеризиране на атрибутите на зловредния софтуер за определяне на характеристиките на зловредния софтуер. Ние постигаме резултат от 50.34/18.0 (тест), 22.23 (тест-данни) и 31.98 (тест-данни) съответно за задача 1, задача 2 и задача 2. Ние също така правим нашите вградени киберсигурност публично достъпни на < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'id': 'Kami menggambarkan sistem yang dikembangkan oleh tim UMBC untuk 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP. Kami berpartisipasi dalam tiga dari sub-tugas: (1) mengklasifikasi kalimat sebagai relevan atau tidak relevan untuk malware, (2) memprediksi label token untuk kalimat, dan (4) memprediksi label atribut dari vokbular Nomerasi Atribut Malware dan Karakterisasi untuk mendefinisikan karakteristik malware. Kami mencapai skor F1 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), dan 31.98 (test-data) untuk Task1, Task2 dan Task2 respectively. Kami juga membuat penerbangan cybersecurity tersedia publik di < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'fa': 'ما سیستم\u200cها را توسط تیم UMBC توسعه داده\u200cایم برای عملۀ ۲۰۱۸ SemEval Task ۸ SecureNLP (استخراج Semantic از REports CybersecUrity با استفاده از پردازش زبان طبیعی) توصیف می\u200cکنیم. ما در سه کار زیر پایه شرکت کردیم: (۱) جمله\u200cها را به عنوان ارتباطی یا بی\u200cارتباطی به مالware، ۲) برچسب\u200cهای نشانه\u200cها برای جمله\u200cها پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند، و (۴) برچسب\u200cهای ویژه\u200cها را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند از جمله\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای مالware برای تعریف ویژه\u200cهای ناپسندیده\u200cها و ما نقطه F1 از 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data) و 31.98 (test-data) برای Task1، Task2 و Task2 (Task2) رسیدیم. ما همچنین داخل امنیت سایت\u200cهایمان را به طور عمومی در < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec .', 'ko': 'UMBC팀이 2018년 SemEval 퀘스트 8 SecureNLP(자연어 처리로 네트워크 보안 보고서에서 의미를 추출)를 위해 개발한 시스템을 묘사했습니다.우리는 그 중 세 가지 하위 임무에 참여했다. (1) 문장을 악성 소프트웨어와 관련되거나 무관하게 분류하고, (2) 문장을 예측하는 표기 라벨과 (4) 악성 소프트웨어의 속성 매거와 특징 어휘에 따라 속성 라벨을 예측하여 악성 소프트웨어의 특징을 정의한다.Task1, Task2와 Task2의 F1 성적은 각각 50.34/18.0(개발/테스트), 22.23(테스트 데이터), 31.98(테스트 데이터)이다.우리는 또한 우리의 네트워크 보안 삽입을 공개합니다<http://bit.ly/cyber2vec>.', 'sw': 'Tunaelezea mfumo uliotengenezwa na timu ya UMBC kwa ajili ya mwaka 2018 SemEval Task 8, Usalama wa NLP (Utoa wa Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports by using the Natural Processing of Language). Tumeshiriki katika kazi tatu za subira: (1) kuandika sentensi kama zinazohusiana au isiyo na maana ya matumizi ya vifaa, (2) kutabiri alama za alama kwa ajili ya hukumu, na (4) kutabiri alama za vigezo kutoka kwenye lugha ya Kuhisi na Kutekeleza Vitabu vya Malware kwa ajili ya kuelezea sifa za vifaa vya vibaya. Tunaweza kufikia vipindi vya F1 kwa asilimia 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (taarifa za mtihani), na 31.98 (taarifa za majaribio) kwa ajili ya kazi 1, kazi 2 na kazi 2. Pia tunafanya usalama wetu wa mtandaoni kuwepo hadharani kwa < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'af': 'Ons beskryf die stelsels wat deur die UMBC-span ontwikkeld is vir 2018 SemEval Taak 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction van CybersecUrity REports gebruik Natuurlike Taal Prosessering). Ons het in drie van die sub-taak gedeel: (1) klassifiseer setinge as relevant of onrelevant to malware, (2) voorskou teken etikette vir setinge, en (4) voorskou eienskappe etikette van die Malware Attribute Enumeracie en Karakterisation woordeboek vir definieer van malware karakteristieke. Ons bereik F1 telling van 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), en 31.98 (test-data) vir Taak1, Taak2 en Taak2 respectively. Ons maak ook ons sybersekuriteit inbettings openlik beskikbaar by < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'am': 'Urity REports using Natural language Processing. በ3 አካባቢዎች ላይ ተጋጠመን:(1) የዌብ መቃወሚያ የሚታያየው ወይም የማይታወቀው መክፈቻዎችን በመግለጥ እና (2) የክስ ምልክት ምልክቶችን ለመቀጠል እና (4) የመልዌር አካባቢ ምርጫዎች እና የፊደል አካላት አካላትን ለመግለጥ የሚታወቅ የአካላት ቃላት ነው፡፡ 1፣ ስራ2 እና ስራ2 የሚደረገውን F1 score 50.34/18.0 (dev/test)፣ 22.23 (ፈተና ዳታ) እና 31.98 (ፈተና ዳታ) አግኝተናል። በ http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'az': 'Biz 2018-ci SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (CybersecUrity REports-dan Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing) t…ôhsil etdiyi sisteml…ôri t…ôsbit edirik. √ú√ß iŇüin altńĪ iŇüin …ô daxil olduq: (1) c√ľml…ôl…ôri malware …ôlam…ôti v…ô ya …ôlam…ôti olmayan, 2) c√ľml…ôl…ôr √ľ√ß√ľn token etiketl…ôrini t…ômin edir v…ô (4) Malware Attribut Enumeration v…ô Karakterizasyon s√∂zl…ôrinin …ôlam…ôtl…ôrini t…ômin edir. Biz F1 n√∂qt…ôsini 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data) v…ô 31.98 (test-data) Task1, Task2 v…ô Task2 √ľ√ß√ľn baŇüa √ßatdńĪq. Biz d…ô sajber t…ôhl√ľk…ôsizlikl…ôrimizi a√ßńĪq-aŇükar m√∂vcuddur. http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'tr': '2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing) tarapyndan gelinýän sistemleri tassyýan edýäris Biz alt-zadyň üç sany işe goşuldyk: (1) sözleriň malwaryýa möhüm ýa-da deňil däldir, (2) sözleriň üçin token etiketlerni öňlenýär, we (4) Malwaryýa Atributler hysablamasynyň we Karakterleme sözleriň hasaplamasyndan ullanýan Biz 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), and 31.98 (test-data) for Task1, Task2 and Task2 respectively achieved. Biz hem öz saýlawlarymyzy publika hasaplanjak üçin < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'sq': 'Ne përshkruajmë sistemet e zhvilluar nga ekipi UMBC për 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Extraction Semantic from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing). We participated in three of the sub-tasks: (1) classifying sentences as being relevant or irrelevant to malware, (2) predicting token labels for sentences, and (4) predicting attribute labels from the Malware Attribute Enumeration and Characterization vocabulary for defining malware characteristics.  Ne arrijmë rezultatin F1 prej 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data) dhe 31.98 (test-data) për Task1, Task2 dhe Task2 respektivisht. Ne gjithashtu i bëjmë përfshirjet tona të sigurisë kibernetike të disponueshme publikisht në < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'bn': 'We describe the systems developed by the UMBC team for 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing).  আমরা সাব-কাজের তিনটির মধ্যে অংশগ্রহণ করেছি: (1) ভুল ওয়্যারের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট অথবা অযোগ্য, ২) বাক্যের জন্য প্রতীক লেবেলের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী এবং (৪) ম্যালওয়্যারের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী হিসেবে বি আমরা পর্যায়ের জন্য ৫০. 34/১৮. ০ (ডিভি/টেস্ট), ২২. ২৩ (পরীক্ষা তথ্য) এবং ৩১. ৯৮ (পরীক্ষার তথ্য) কাজ, কাজ ২ এবং কাজ ২। আমরা আমাদের সাইবার নিরাপত্তা প্রকাশ্যে প্রবেশ করার জন্য প্রকাশ্যে < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'bs': 'Mi opisujemo sisteme koje je razvila UMBC tim za 2018. SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantička izvlačenja iz CybersecUrity REports koristeći prirodni jezik proces). Učestvovali smo u tri podzadataka: 1) klasifikacija rečenica kao relevantna ili neovisna na malver, 2) predviđanja etiketa znakova za rečenice, i 4) predviđanja etiketa atributa iz proračuna i rečnika karakterizacije pripadnika malwarea za definiranje karakteristika malwarea. Postajemo rezultat F1 od 50,34/18,0 (dev/test), 22,23 (test-data), i 31,98 (test-data) za Task1, Task2 i Task2. Također činimo naše sajber sigurnosti javno dostupne na < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec - Da.', 'hy': 'Մենք նկարագրում ենք համակարգերը, որոնք կառուցել են 2018 թ. Մենք մասնակցեցինք երեք ենթախնդիրներին: (1) դասակարգում ենք նախադասությունները որպես կարևոր կամ անկարևոր սխալ-ծրագրերի համար, (2) կանխատեսում ենք նախադասությունների նշանների պիտակները, և (4) կանխատեսում ենք նախադասությունների նշանների պիտակները Մալվարի առանձնահատկությունների թվայնման և հատկությունների բառարանում սխալ-ծ We achieve F1 score of 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), and 31.98 (test-data) for Task1, Task2 and Task2 respectively.  Մենք նաև հանրային հասանելի ենք դարձնում մեր կիբեր ապահովության ներդրումները http://bit.ly/cyber2vec ]:', 'et': 'Kirjeldame UMBC meeskonna poolt 2018. aasta SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing) välja töötatud süsteeme. Osalesime kolmes alamülesandes: (1) lausete klassifitseerimine pahavara puhul asjakohaste või ebaoluliste omadustena, (2) lausete märgistuste ennustamine ja (4) pahavara atribuutide loendamise ja iseloomustamise sõnavara atribuudide ennustamine pahavara omaduste määratlemiseks. Me saavutame F1 skoori 50,34/18,0 (dev/test), 22,23 (testiandmed) ja 31,98 (testiandmed) vastavalt ülesande 1, ülesande 2 ja ülesande 2 puhul. Samuti teeme oma küberturvalisuse manustamise avalikult kättesaadavaks aadressil < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'ca': "Descrivem els sistemes desenvolupats per l'equip UMBC per 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP. Vam participar en tres de les sub-tasques: (1) classificar les frases com pertinents o irrelevants per al malware, (2) predir etiquetes de fitxes per les frases, i (4) predir etiquetes d'atributs del vocabulari de nombració i caracterització d'atributs malware per definir les característiques del malware. Obtenim una puntuació F1 de 50,34/18,0 (dev/test), 22,23 (test-data) i 31,98 (test-data) per a Task1, Task2 i Task2 respectivament. També fem públic la nostra integració de la cibersiguretat a < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.", 'cs': 'Popisujeme systémy vyvinuté týmem UMBC pro 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Sémantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing). Podíleli jsme se na třech dílčích úkolech: (1) klasifikaci vět jako relevantních nebo irelevantních pro malware, (2) předpověď značek tokenů pro věty a (4) předpověď značek atributů ze slovníku Počet a Charakterizace malwarových atributů pro definování charakteristik malwaru. Dosahujeme F1 skóre 50.34/18.0 (vývoj/test), 22.23 (testovací data) a 31.98 (testovací data) pro Task1, Task2 a Task2. Naše vložení kybernetické bezpečnosti také zpřístupníme veřejně na adrese < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'fi': 'Kuvaamme UMBC-tiimin kehittämät järjestelmät 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing). Osallistuimme kolmeen alatehtävään: (1) lauseiden luokittelu haittaohjelmien kannalta merkityksellisiksi tai merkityksettömiksi, (2) lauseiden tunnisteiden ennustaminen ja (4) attribuuttien tunnisteiden ennustaminen haittaohjelmien ominaisuuksien määrittelyyn haittaohjelmien attribuuttien lukumäärän ja luonnehdinnan sanastosta. F1-pisteet ovat 50,34/18,0 (kehitys/testi), 22,23 (testitiedot) ja 31,98 (testitiedot) tehtävällä 1, tehtävällä 2 ja tehtävällä 2. Lisäksi tuomme kyberturvallisuuden upotukset julkisesti saataville osoitteessa < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé pisan sistem sing nggawe nggawe tarjamahan karo nggawe Ngubah Ubah sing dumadhi cara-cara nggawe nang 2008 semebal task 8, Seure NLP Awak dhéwé éntukno telu podcast: : We success F1 punctuation of 5.34/18.0 (Dev/test), 22.22 (test-data), and 31.9 (test-data) for task1, task2 and task2 responsibly. security embedding http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >', 'he': 'אנחנו מתארים את המערכות שפותחות על ידי צוות UMBC עבור משימה חצי ערך 8, SecureNLP 2018. השתתפנו בשלושה משימות התחתונה: (1) להקליף משפטים כאלו רלוונטיים או לא רלוונטיים לתוכנית קשה, (2) לחזות תוויות סימנים למשפטים, ו (4) לחזות תוויות תכונות מהמילון המספר של תכונות קשה ולהגדיר תכונות קשה. אנחנו משיגים נקודת F1 של 50.34/18.0 (dev/test), 22.23 (test-data), 31.98 (test-data) עבור Task1, Task2 ולTask2 בהתאם. אנחנו גם מקבלים את התקפות הבטיחות הסייברטית שלנו פנויות בפומבי ב < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'ha': "Tuna bayyana na'urar tsarin da aka developed by the UMC team for 2018 SemEal Tasks 8, safe NLP (Semantic Extraction from cyberseparation re-Ports by Natural language Performance). Mun yi rabo cikin uku na aikin sub-aikin:(1) kayan rarraba maganar ta zama mai amfani da shi ko kuma bã ya da ƙẽtare wa shirin ayuka, (2) kuma mun yi gargaɗi cikin alama na ayukan ayuka wa masu zartar da shi, da (4) kuma babu wani alama na fassarar fanatin matsayin na Kibainin na Malware da kuma a bayyana wa sifatinin misware. Mu samu F1 score 50.34/18.0 (dak/jarraba), 22.23 (data za'a jarraba), da 31.98 (data za'a jarraba) wa Task1, Task2 da Task2. Kayya, muna samun masu tsari da intaineta da bayyane a < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >", 'sk': 'Opisujemo sisteme, ki jih je ekipa UMBC razvila za leto 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity REports using Natural Language Processing). Sodelovali smo pri treh podnalogah: (1) razvrščanje stavkov kot pomembnih ali nepomembnih za zlonamerno programsko opremo, (2) napovedovanje oznak žetonov za stavke in (4) napovedovanje oznak atributov iz besedišča številčenja in karakterizacije zlonamerne programske opreme za opredelitev značilnosti zlonamerne programske opreme. Rezultat F1 je 50,34/18,0 (razvoj/test), 22,23 (testni podatki) in 31,98 (testni podatki) za nalogo 1 oziroma nalogo 2. Naše vgradnje kibernetske varnosti so javno dostopne tudi na spletni strani < http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >.', 'bo': 'We describe the systems developed by the UMBC team for 2018 SemEval Task 8, SecureNLP (Semantic Extraction from CybersecUrity REports using Natural Language Processing). We participated in three of the sub-tasks: (1) classifying sentences as being relevant or irrelevant to malware, (2) predicting token labels for sentences, and (4) predicting attribute labels from the Malware Attribute Enumeration and Characterization vocabulary for defining malware characteristics. ང་ཚོས་F1་གྲངས་ཚད་དང་། 50.34/18.0 (dev/test)ཡིན་པ་ལས་མཐུན་ཐུབ།22.23 (test-data) དང་། 31.98 (test-data) ལས་ཀ་1ལས་ཀ་དང་། ལས་ཀ་2ལས་ཀ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིན་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འཛམ་གླིང་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཁ་ཕྱེད་ཀྱིས་ཡོད། http://bit.ly/cyber2vec >'}
{'en': 'Villani at SemEval-2018 Task 8 : Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'ar': 'Villani في SemEval-2018 المهمة 8: الاستخراج الدلالي من تقارير الأمن السيبراني باستخدام التعلم التمثيلي', 'pt': 'Villani no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 8: Extração Semântica de Relatórios de Cibersegurança usando Aprendizagem de Representação', 'fr': "Villani au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 8\xa0: Extraction sémantique à partir de rapports de cybersécurité à l'aide de l'apprentissage", 'es': 'Villani en Semeval-2018 Tarea 8: Extracción semántica de informes de ciberseguridad mediante el aprendizaje de representación', 'zh': 'Villani于SemEval-2018事8:以学取语义于网络安全', 'ja': 'Villani at SemEval -2018タスク8 ：表現学習を使用したサイバーセキュリティレポートからのセマンティック抽出', 'ru': 'Виллани на SemEval-2018 Задача 8: Семантическое извлечение из отчетов о кибербезопасности с использованием репрезентативного обучения', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 8 पर Villani: प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने का उपयोग कर साइबर सुरक्षा रिपोर्ट से शब्दार्थ निष्कर्षण', 'ga': 'Villani ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 8: Eastóscadh Séimeantach ó Thuarascálacha Cibearshlándála ag Úsáid Foghlaim Léiriúcháin', 'ka': 'ვილიანი SemEval-2018 დავალება 8: საიბერსუკური რეპორტიებიდან Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'hu': 'Villani a SemEval-2018 8. feladat: Szemantikus kivonás a kiberbiztonsági jelentésekből a reprezentációs tanulás segítségével', 'el': 'Καθήκον 8: Σημαντική εξαγωγή από αναφορές κυβερνοασφάλειας χρησιμοποιώντας τη μάθηση εκπροσώπησης', 'it': "Villani a SemEval-2018 Task 8: Estrazione semantica dai report di sicurezza informatica utilizzando l'apprendimento della rappresentazione", 'mk': 'Villani at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'lt': '8 užduotis: Semantinis kibernetinio saugumo ataskaitų ištraukimas naudojant atstovavimo mokymąsi', 'mt': 'Villani f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 8: Estrazzjoni Semantika mir-Rapporti dwar iċ-Ċibersigurtà bl-użu tat-Tagħlim tar-Rappreżentanza', 'kk': 'Мақсат 8: Көпшілік қауіпсіздік мәліметтерден Semantic Extraction Reports using Representation Learning', 'ms': 'Villani di SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Ekstraksi Semantic dari Laporan Keselamatan Cybersecurity menggunakan Belajar Perwakilan', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 8: പ്രതിനിധി പഠിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സൈബെര്\u200dസിക്ക് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും സെമാന്\u200dറ', 'no': 'Villani at semiEval-2018 Task 8: Semantisk utpakking frå sybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'ro': 'Villani la SemEval-2018 Task 8: Extragerea semantică din rapoartele de securitate cibernetică folosind învățarea reprezentării', 'pl': 'Villani w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 8: Ekstrakcja semantyczna z raportów cyberbezpieczeństwa przy użyciu uczenia się reprezentacji', 'si': 'විලානි සෙම්වෙල්-2018 කාර්ය 8: සෙමාන්ටික් පිළිගන්න සායිබර්සුකුරිත් වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ඉගෙනීම්', 'sr': 'Villani na semiEval-2018 zadatku 8: Semantička izvlačenja iz izveštaja o sajber sigurnosti koristeći učenje predstavnika', 'so': 'Villani at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Reports of Security Cybers using Representation Learning', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018ல் வில்லானி', 'sv': 'Villani på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 8: Semantisk extraktion från cybersäkerhetsrapporter med hjälp av representationslärande', 'ur': 'سیم ایولی-2018 ٹاکس 8 میں ویلینی: سایر ایرپورتیٹ سیکھنے کے مطابق سایر ایرپورتیٹ راپورت سے سیم انتقال', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': '(khai thác hóa) từ Trung học Bảo mật Trung Quốc', 'nl': 'Villani bij SemEval-2018 Taak 8: Semantische Extractie uit Cybersecurity Rapporten met behulp van Representation Learning', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Семантично извличане от доклади за киберсигурност чрез обучение по представителство', 'da': 'Villani på SemEval-2018 Opgave 8: Semantisk uddrag fra cybersikkerhedsrapporter ved hjælp af repræsentationslæring', 'hr': 'Villani na zadatku 8: Semantička izvlačenja iz izvješća o sigurnosti kibernaca koristeći učenje predstavnika', 'de': 'Aufgabe 8: Semantische Extraktion aus Cybersicherheitsberichten mittels Repräsentation Learning', 'id': 'Villani di SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Ekstraksi Semantik dari Laporan Keamanan Sibernetik menggunakan Belajar Perwakilan', 'ko': 'Villani가SemEval-18 퀘스트 참가8: 표징 학습을 사용하여 네트워크 안전 보고서에서 의미 추출', 'fa': 'ویلانی در ماموریت ۲۰۱۸: استخراج سیمنتیک از گزارش\u200cهای محافظت سایر با استفاده از آموزش نمایندگان', 'sw': 'Villani at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'tr': 'Villani at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'af': 'Villani by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 8: Semantiese Uitpakking van Sibersekuriteitsraporte', 'sq': 'Villani në SemEval-2018 Task 8: Extraction Semantic from Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'am': 'Villani በSemEval-2018 ስራ 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'az': 'Villani at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮-এর কাজ ৮: প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে সাইবার নিরাপত্তা রিপোর্ট থেকে সেম্যান্টিক প্রক্রিয়া', 'hy': 'Վիլանին 2018-ի "Սեմենտիկ Ավստահության" 8-րդ հանձնարարությունում\' օգտագործելով ներկայացման ուսումնասիրություն', 'bs': 'Villani na semiEval-2018 zadatku 8: Semantička izvlačenja iz izvještaja o sigurnosti kibernezavisnosti koristeći učenje predstavnika', 'ca': 'Villani a SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning', 'cs': 'Villani na SemEval-2018 Úkol 8: Sémantická extrakce ze zpráv kybernetické bezpečnosti pomocí reprezentačního učení', 'et': 'Villani SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 8: Semantiline väljavõte küberturvalisuse aruannetest esindusõppe abil', 'fi': 'Villani SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 8: Semanttinen poiminta kyberturvallisuusraporteista edustusoppimisen avulla', 'jv': 'Wilani at seminval-2008 task 8: semanti extract from Cibersecurity Report s use representation Learning', 'he': 'וילאני ב SemEval-2018 משימה 8: Extraction סמנטית מדווחים על בטחון Cybersecurity באמצעות לימוד מייצג', 'sk': 'Villani na SemEval-2018 naloga 8: Semantni izvleček poročil o kibernetski varnosti z uporabo reprezentacijskega učenja', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'bo': 'Villani at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports using Representation Learning'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe our proposal for the task of Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports. The goal is to explore if natural language processing methods can provide relevant and actionable knowledge to contribute to better understand malicious behavior. Our method consists of an attention-based Bi-LSTM which achieved competitive performance of 0.57 for the Subtask 1. In the due process we also present ablation studies across multiple embeddings and their level of representation and also report the strategies we used to mitigate the extreme imbalance between classes.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons notre proposition pour la tâche d'extraction sémantique à partir de rapports de cybersécurité. L'objectif est de déterminer si les méthodes de traitement du langage naturel peuvent fournir des connaissances pertinentes et exploitables pour contribuer à mieux comprendre les comportements malveillants. Notre méthode consiste en un Bi-LSTM basé sur l'attention qui a atteint une performance compétitive de 0,57 pour la sous-tâche 1. Dans le cadre de la procédure régulière, nous présentons également des études d'ablation sur plusieurs intégrations et leur niveau de représentation, ainsi que les stratégies que nous avons utilisées pour atténuer le déséquilibre extrême entre les classes.", 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف اقتراحنا لمهمة الاستخراج الدلالي من تقارير الأمن السيبراني. الهدف هو استكشاف ما إذا كانت طرق معالجة اللغة الطبيعية يمكن أن توفر المعرفة ذات الصلة والقابلة للتنفيذ للمساهمة في فهم السلوك الضار بشكل أفضل. تتكون طريقتنا من Bi-LSTM القائم على الانتباه والذي حقق أداءً تنافسيًا قدره 0.57 للمهمة الفرعية 1. في العملية القانونية ، نقدم أيضًا دراسات الاجتثاث عبر حفلات الزفاف المتعددة ومستوى تمثيلها وكذلك الإبلاغ عن الاستراتيجيات التي استخدمناها للتخفيف من أقصى عدم التوازن بين الطبقات.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos nossa proposta para a tarefa de extração semântica de relatórios de segurança cibernética. O objetivo é explorar se os métodos de processamento de linguagem natural podem fornecer conhecimento relevante e acionável para contribuir para uma melhor compreensão do comportamento malicioso. Nosso método consiste em um Bi-LSTM baseado em atenção que alcançou um desempenho competitivo de 0,57 para a Subtarefa 1. No devido processo, também apresentamos estudos de ablação em várias incorporações e seu nível de representação e também relatamos as estratégias que usamos para mitigar os extremos desequilíbrio entre as classes.', 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos nuestra propuesta para la tarea de Extracción Semántica a partir de Informes de Ciberseguridad. El objetivo es explorar si los métodos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural pueden proporcionar conocimientos relevantes y prácticos para contribuir a comprender mejor el comportamiento malicioso. Nuestro método consiste en un Bi-LSTM basado en la atención que logró un rendimiento competitivo de 0.57 para la Subtarea 1. En el debido proceso, también presentamos estudios de ablación en múltiples incrustaciones y su nivel de representación, y también informamos las estrategias que utilizamos para mitigar el desequilibrio extremo entre clases.', 'ja': '本稿では、サイバーセキュリティレポートからのセマンティック抽出のタスクに関する提案について説明します。目標は、自然言語処理方法が悪意のある行動をよりよく理解するために貢献するための関連性のある実用的な知識を提供できるかどうかを探ることです。私たちの方法は、サブタスク1で0.57の競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成したアテンションベースのBi - LSTMで構成されています。適切なプロセスでは、複数の埋め込みとその表現レベルにわたるアブレーション研究を提示し、クラス間の極端な不均衡を軽減するために使用した戦略も報告します。', 'zh': '于本文,述网络安全言事语义。 求自然语言之道,可以相关而作也,以助善知恶也。 吾道由注意之Bi-LSTM,双 LSTM成于子10.57之争性。 正当程序中,又言销融及表徵水平,且言缓类间极不平之策。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम साइबर सुरक्षा रिपोर्ट से शब्दार्थ निष्कर्षण के कार्य के लिए हमारे प्रस्ताव का वर्णन करते हैं। लक्ष्य यह पता लगाना है कि क्या प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण विधियां दुर्भावनापूर्ण व्यवहार को बेहतर ढंग से समझने में योगदान करने के लिए प्रासंगिक और कार्रवाई योग्य ज्ञान प्रदान कर सकती हैं। हमारी विधि में एक ध्यान-आधारित Bi-LSTM शामिल है जिसने Subtask 1 के लिए 0.57 का प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन हासिल किया। उचित प्रक्रिया में हम कई एम्बेडिंग और उनके प्रतिनिधित्व के स्तर पर एब्लेशन अध्ययन भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं और उन रणनीतियों की भी रिपोर्ट करते हैं जिनका उपयोग हम कक्षाओं के बीच चरम असंतुलन को कम करने के लिए करते थे।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем наше предложение по задаче семантического извлечения из отчетов о кибербезопасности. Цель состоит в том, чтобы выяснить, могут ли методы обработки естественного языка обеспечить актуальные и действенные знания, способствующие лучшему пониманию вредоносного поведения. Наш метод состоит из Bi-LSTM, основанного на внимании, которое достигло конкурентной производительности 0,57 для Подзадачи 1. В надлежащей процедуре мы также представляем исследования абляции по нескольким вложениям и их уровню представления, а также сообщаем о стратегиях, которые мы использовали для смягчения крайнего дисбаланса между классами.', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar ár dtogra maidir le tasc na dTuarascálacha um Eastóscadh Séimeantach ó Chibearshlándáil. Is é an sprioc a fhiosrú an féidir le modhanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha eolas ábhartha agus inghníomhaithe a sholáthar chun cuidiú le tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar iompar mailíseach. Is éard atá inár modh ná Bi-LSTM aird-bhunaithe a bhain feidhmíocht iomaíoch 0.57 amach le haghaidh Fothasc 1. Sa phróiseas cuí cuirimid i láthair freisin staidéir eisearthála thar il-leabaithe agus a leibhéal ionadaíochta agus tuairiscímid freisin ar na straitéisí a d'úsáideamar chun an fothasc a mhaolú. éagothroime idir ranganna.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენი წარმოდგენა საიბერსიკუნეტიკური რეპორტებისგან სემონტიკური ექქტაქციის საქმე. მიზეზი არის გავაკვიროთ თუ ნაირადი ენის პროცესი მეტოვები შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ მნიშვნელოვანი და მოქმედებელოვანი მეცნიერები, რომლებიც უფრო უფრო უფრო ჩვენი პროცემი შექმნა ბი-LSTM, რომელიც 0.57 წლის კონსპექტიური გამოსახულებას მივიღეთ Subtask 1-ზე. სწორედ პროცესიში ჩვენ ასევე გავამხსენებთ წარმოდგენების სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ და ისინი სწორედ გამოსაყენებული სტრატეგიები, რომლებიც ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ კლასის შორის ს', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, περιγράφουμε την πρότασή μας για το έργο της Σημαντικής Εξόρυξης από Αναφορές Κυβερνητικής Ασφάλειας. Στόχος είναι να διερευνηθεί εάν οι μέθοδοι επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας μπορούν να παρέχουν σχετικές και εφαρμόσιμες γνώσεις για να συμβάλουν στην καλύτερη κατανόηση της κακόβουλης συμπεριφοράς. Η μέθοδος μας αποτελείται από ένα βασισμένο στην προσοχή Bi-LSTM που πέτυχε ανταγωνιστική απόδοση 0.57 για την Υποεργασία 1. Στη σωστή διαδικασία παρουσιάζουμε επίσης μελέτες αφαίρεσης σε πολλαπλές ενσωματώσεις και το επίπεδο εκπροσώπησής τους και αναφέρουμε επίσης τις στρατηγικές που χρησιμοποιήσαμε για να μετριάσουμε την ακραία ανισορροπία μεταξύ των τάξεων.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban ismertetjük a kiberbiztonsági jelentésekből szemantikus kivonás feladatára vonatkozó javaslatunkat. A cél annak feltárása, hogy a természetes nyelvi feldolgozási módszerek releváns és cselekvésre alkalmas ismereteket nyújthatnak-e a rosszindulatú viselkedés jobb megértéséhez. Módszerünk egy figyelem alapú Bi-LSTM-ből áll, amely 0,57 versenyteljesítményt ért el az 1. alcsoport esetében. A megfelelő folyamat során bemutatjuk a több beágyazásra vonatkozó ablációs tanulmányokat és azok reprezentációs szintjét, valamint beszámolunk azokról a stratégiákról, amelyeket az osztályok közötti rendkívüli egyensúlyhiány enyhítésére használtunk.', 'it': "In questo articolo, descriviamo la nostra proposta per il compito di estrazione semantica dai report di sicurezza informatica. L'obiettivo è quello di esplorare se i metodi di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale possono fornire conoscenze pertinenti e attuabili per contribuire a comprendere meglio i comportamenti dannosi. Il nostro metodo consiste in un Bi-LSTM basato sull'attenzione che ha raggiunto prestazioni competitive di 0,57 per il Subtask 1. Nel giusto processo presentiamo anche studi di ablazione su più embedding e il loro livello di rappresentazione e riportiamo anche le strategie utilizzate per mitigare l'estremo squilibrio tra le classi.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник го опишуваме нашиот предлог за задачата на семантичната екстракција од извештаите за кибер-безбедност. Целта е да се истражи дали природните методи на процес на јазик можат да обезбедат релевантно и активно знаење за да придонесат за подобро разбирање на злото однесување. Нашиот метод се состои од Би-ЛСТМ базиран на внимание, кој постигна конкурентна перформанса од 0,57 за Subtask 1. Во соодветниот процес, исто така, ги претставуваме студиите за аблација низ повеќето вложувања и нивното ниво на претставување и исто така ги известуваме стратегиите кои ги користевме за намалување на екстремниот нерамнотеж помеѓу класите.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз Cybersecurity Reports тапсырмасынан Semantic Extraction тапсырмасының тапсырмамызды анықтаймыз. Мақсат - табиғи тілдерді өңдеу әдістерінің қасиетті және әрекетті білім беруге мүмкіндік беруге болады. Біздің әдіміміз, 1- тапсырма үшін 0.57 жылдамдық істеу үшін бақылау бағдарламасынан негізделген Bi- LSTM бағдарламасынан тұрады. Бірнеше процестерде біз көптеген ендіру және олардың түсіндіру деңгейінде жұмыс істеу зерттеулерін таңдаймыз, сондай-ақ біз класс арасындағы стратегияларды өзгертуге болатын.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname savo pasiūlymą dėl Semantinio ekstrahavimo iš kibernetinio saugumo ataskaitų užduoties. Tikslas – ištirti, ar natūralūs kalbų apdorojimo metodai gali suteikti reikiamų ir įmanomų žinių siekiant geriau suprasti piktybinį elgesį. Mūsų metodą sudaro dėmesiu grindžiama dviejų geležinkelių riedmenų sistema, pagal kurią 1 pakopos užduoties konkurenciniai rezultatai buvo 0,57. Atitinkamame procese taip pat pristatome įvairių sudedamųjų dalių abliacijos tyrimus ir jų atstovavimo lygį, taip pat pranešame apie strategijas, kuriomis kovojome su ekstremaliu klasių disbalansu.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menjelaskan cadangan kami untuk tugas Ekstraksi Semantic dari Laporan Keselamatan Cyber. Tujuan adalah untuk mengeksplorasi jika kaedah pemprosesan bahasa alam boleh menyediakan pengetahuan yang relevan dan boleh bertindak untuk menyumbang untuk memahami lebih baik perilaku jahat. Kaedah kami terdiri dari Bi-LSTM berdasarkan perhatian yang mencapai prestasi kompetitif 0.57 untuk Subtugas 1. Dalam proses yang tepat, kami juga memperkenalkan kajian ablasi melalui pelbagai penerbangan dan aras perwakilan mereka dan juga melaporkan strategi yang kami gunakan untuk mengurangi ketidakseimbangan ekstrim antara kelas.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, സൈബെര്\u200dസിക്ക് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് സെമാന്\u200dറിക് പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രോദ്യം  സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്ര രീതികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുവാനും പ്രവർത്തനവും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവുമായ അറിവ്  ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ബി-എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിം അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയിലുണ്ട്. അത് സുബ്ബഡിസ് 1-ന് വേണ്ടി പ്രത In the due process we also present ablation studies across multiple embeddings and their level of representation and also report the strategies we used to mitigate the extreme imbalance between classes.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, aħna niddeskrivu l-proposta tagħna għall-kompitu ta’ Estrazzjoni Semantika mir-Rapporti dwar iċ-Ċibersigurtà. L-għan huwa li jiġi esplorat jekk il-metodi naturali tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi jistgħux jipprovdu għarfien rilevanti u azzjonabbli biex jikkontribwixxu biex jifhmu aħjar imġiba malizzjuża. Il-metodu tagħna jikkonsisti f’Bi-LSTM ibbażat fuq l-attenzjoni li kiseb prestazzjoni kompetittiva ta’ 0.57 għas-Subkompitu 1. Fil-proċess dovut qed nippreżentaw ukoll studji dwar l-ablazzjoni f’diversi inkorporazzjonijiet u l-livell ta’ rappreżentanza tagħhom u rrappurtaw ukoll l-istrateġiji li ntużaw biex itaffu l-iżbilanċ estrem bejn il-klassijiet.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi forslag vårt for oppgåva av semantisk utpakking frå cybersecurity Reports. Målet er å utforske om naturspråksbehandlingsmetodar kan gje relevante og handsamarbare kunnskap for å bidra til bedre forståelse av vilkårleg atferd. Metoden vårt består av ein oppmerksbasert bi-LSTM som oppnådd konkurentivt utvikling av 0,57 for Subtask 1. I tilfeldige prosessen presenterer vi også ablasjonssøker over fleire innbyggingar og deres representasjonsnivå og rapporterer også strategiane vi brukte til å gjere den ekstreme ulikheten mellom klasser.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy naszą propozycję dotyczącą zadania ekstrakcji semantycznej z raportów cyberbezpieczeństwa. Celem jest zbadanie, czy metody przetwarzania języka naturalnego mogą zapewnić istotną i wydajną wiedzę, aby przyczynić się do lepszego zrozumienia złośliwego zachowania. Nasza metoda składa się z opartego na uwadze Bi-LSTM, który osiągnął konkurencyjną wydajność 0,57 dla Podzadania 1. W odpowiednim procesie prezentujemy również badania ablacji wielu osadzeń i ich poziom reprezentacji, a także raportujemy strategie, które stosowaliśmy w celu złagodzenia skrajnej nierównowagi między klasami.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид цахилгаан аюулгүй мэдээллээс Semantic Extraction Reports-ын үйлдлийг тайлбарлаж байна. Цаг нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх арга замыг сайн ойлгохын тулд хамааралтай, үйлдвэрлэх боломжтой мэдлэг хангаж чадах эсэхийг судлах юм. Бидний арга нь анхаарлын үндсэн Би-ЛСТМ юм. Холбогдолтой үйл явцдаа бид олон тохиолдолд, тэдний төвшин үзүүлэлтийг дамжуулж, мөн хичээлийн хоорондын хамгийн их тэгшитгэл байдлыг багасгах стратегийг дамжуулж байна.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naš prijedlog za zadatak Semantičkog izvlačenja iz izveštaja o sajber sigurnosti. Cilj je istražiti ako prirodne metode obrade jezika mogu pružiti relevantne i aktivne znanje da bi doprinosili boljem razumijevanju zlonamjernog ponašanja. Naš metod se sastoji od pažnje baziranog Bi-LSTM koji je ostvario konkurentnu funkciju od 0,57 za podzadatak 1. U dužnom procesu takođe predstavljamo proučavanje ablacije preko višestrukih integracija i njihovog nivoa zastupanja i prijavljujemo strategije koje smo koristili za smanjenje ekstremne nelegalnosti između klasa.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem propunerea noastră pentru sarcina extragerii semantice din rapoartele de securitate cibernetică. Scopul este de a explora dacă metodele de procesare a limbajului natural pot oferi cunoștințe relevante și utile pentru a contribui la o mai bună înțelegere a comportamentului rău intenționat. Metoda noastră constă într-un Bi-LSTM bazat pe atenție, care a obținut performanțe competitive de 0,57 pentru Subsarcina 1. În procesul corespunzător, prezentăm, de asemenea, studii de ablație pe mai multe încorporări și nivelul lor de reprezentare și, de asemenea, raportăm strategiile pe care le-am folosit pentru a atenua dezechilibrul extrem dintre clase.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය විස්තර කරනවා සයිබර්සුකුරිත් වාර්තාවෙන් සෙමැන්ටික් නිකිරීමේ වැඩක්  අරමුණය තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස කරන විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සහ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක දැනගන්න පුළුවන්  අපේ පද්ධතියේ අවධානය සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතිය Bi-LSTM එකක් තියෙන්නේ. ඒකෙන් 0.57 වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතිය 1 වෙ අනිවාර්යයෙන් අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ස්ථානය', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi vårt förslag till uppgiften Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports. Målet är att undersöka om naturliga språkbehandlingsmetoder kan ge relevant och handlingsbar kunskap för att bidra till att bättre förstå skadliga beteenden. Vår metod består av en uppmärksamhetsbaserad Bi-LSTM som uppnådde en konkurrenskraftig prestanda på 0,57 för Subtask 1. I vederbörlig process presenterar vi också ablationsstudier över flera inbäddningar och deras representationsnivå samt rapporterar de strategier vi använde för att mildra den extrema obalansen mellan klasser.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اپنے پیشنهاد کو سایر سیبرسیکیٹ راپورٹ سے سیمنٹی اخراج کی کوشش کے لئے بیان کیا ہے۔ مقصد یہ ہے کہ اچھی بات سمجھنے کے لئے اچھی طرح کی زبان پردازی کی طریقے سے اچھی طریقے کی سمجھنے کے لئے اچھی طریقے کے ساتھ حاصل کرنے کے لئے موجود اور فعال کرنے کے قابل علم کا حصہ دے سکے۔ ہمارا طریقہ ایک توجه پر بنیاد بیل سیٹم کی ہے جس نے 0.57 کے مطابق سوب ٹاکس ۱ کے لئے مقابلہ کی فعالیت پہنچائی ہے. ہم نے بہت سی ایمبڈینگ اور ان کی نمایش سطح میں بھی آزمائش پڑھنے کی تحقیقات پیش کیے اور ہم نے کلاس کے درمیان بہت زیادہ نابرابری کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے استراتژیکوں کو بھی گزارے۔', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qoraynaa warqaddayada ku qoran shaqada soo saarista Semantic Reports-Security Cybernetka. Ujeedadu waa in baaraandegista, haddii qaababka baaraandegista luqada dabiicadda ah ay heli karto aqoonta la xiriira iyo waxqabashada si ay ugu faa’iido inay ka gartaan tababarka sharka ah. Metalkeena waxaa ka mid ah Bi-LSTM oo ku habboon, kaasoo dhamaaday sameynta iskutar u tartanka 0.57 ee Subaxa 1. Sidoo kale xittaa waxaynu soo bandhignaa waxbarashada tababarida oo kala duduwan iyo heerarka qaabilaadda, waxaana sidoo kale wargelinaynaa qorshaha aan u isticmaalnay si aan u qiyaastno sinnaanta aad u baahan fasalka dhexdooda.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சைப்பர் பாதுகாப்பு அறிக்கைகளில் இருந்து செமான்டிக் வெளியேற்றப்படும் பணிக்கான இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் முறைமைகள் தொடர்புள்ள மற்றும் செயல்படும் அறிவு வழங்கும் என்றால் செயல்படும் செயல்படும் அறி Our method consists of an attention-based Bi-LSTM which achieved competitive performance of 0.57 for the Subtask 1.  நாங்கள் பல முழுவதும் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய பிரதிநிதியின் நிலையையும் முழுமையாக்கும் படிப்புகளையும் கொண்டு வருகிறோம் மற்றும் நா', 'uz': "In this paper, we describe our proposal for the task of Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports.  Masalan, aslida tilni boshqarish usullarini o'rganish mumkin va qo'llab boʻlgan narsalarni yaxshi ko'rsatish mumkin. Bi-LSTM (Bi-LSTM) asosida bir usul bo'ladi, bu Sub-1 vazifasi 0.57 ga rivojlanadigan rivojlanish imkoniyatini bajardi. Bir xil vazifa davomida biz bir necha bo'lgan tashkilotlarni o'rganamiz va ularning taqdimotidagi darajada ko'plab o'rganamiz va biz sinfning orasidagi juda ko'p balandlikni kamaytirish uchun ishlatilgan strategiyaga qaramamiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả đề xuất của chúng tôi về nhiệm vụ tách rời Trung học từ các báo cáo an ninh mạng. Mục tiêu là tìm hiểu liệu phương pháp xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên có thể cung cấp kiến thức thích hợp và hữu ích để có thể góp phần hiểu rõ hành vi xấu xa hơn. Cách của chúng tôi có thể phục nhận một quý trị của hai-LSTM. Một cách được tạo hiện vị của 0.57 cho Subask 1. Trong quá trình thích hợp, chúng tôi cũng đưa ra các nghiên cứu có khả năng xóa bỏ nhiều sự ràng buộc và mức độ đại diện của họ và cũng báo cáo các chiến lược chúng tôi dùng để giảm thiểu sự mất cân bằng cực kỳ giữa các lớp học.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we ons voorstel voor de taak van Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports. Het doel is te onderzoeken of natuurlijke taalverwerkingsmethoden relevante en bruikbare kennis kunnen bieden om kwaadaardig gedrag beter te begrijpen. Onze methode bestaat uit een op aandacht gebaseerde Bi-LSTM die concurrerende prestaties van 0.57 behaalde voor de Subtask 1. In het juiste proces presenteren we ook ablatiestudies over meerdere embeddings en hun representatieniveau en rapporteren we ook de strategieën die we hebben gebruikt om de extreme onevenwichtigheid tussen klassen te verminderen.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме нашето предложение за задачата Семантично извличане от доклади за киберсигурност. Целта е да се проучи дали методите за обработка на естествения език могат да предоставят подходящи и приложими знания, които да допринесат за по-добро разбиране на злонамереното поведение. Методът ни се състои от базиран на вниманието Би-ЛСТМ, който постигна конкурентни резултати от 0,57 за подзадача 1. В процеса на справедливост представяме и аблационни проучвания на множество вграждания и тяхното ниво на представителство, както и стратегиите, които използвахме за смекчаване на крайния дисбаланс между класовете.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi vores forslag til opgaven med Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports. Målet er at undersøge, om metoder til behandling af naturligt sprog kan give relevant og handlingsbar viden, der bidrager til bedre at forstå ondsindet adfærd. Vores metode består af en opmærksomhedsbaseret Bi-LSTM, som opnåede en konkurrencepræstation på 0,57 for Subtask 1. I den rette proces præsenterer vi også ablationsstudier på tværs af flere indlejringer og deres repræsentationsniveau og rapporterer også de strategier, vi brugte til at afbøde den ekstreme ubalance mellem klasserne.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo svoj prijedlog za zadatak Semantičkog izvlačenja iz izvještaja o sigurnosti kibernaca. Cilj je istražiti ako prirodne metode obrade jezika mogu pružiti relevantne i djelatne znanje kako bi se doprinijelo boljem razumijevanju zlonamjernog ponašanja. Naš metod se sastoji od pozornog Bi-LSTM-a koji je postigao konkurentne učinke 0,57 za podzadatak 1. U dužnom procesu također predstavljamo proučavanje ablacije u razini višestrukih integracija i njihove razine zastupanja i prijavljujemo strategije koje smo koristili za smanjenje ekstremne neravnoteže između razreda.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir unseren Vorschlag zur Aufgabe der Semantischen Extraktion aus Cybersicherheitsberichten. Ziel ist es herauszufinden, ob Methoden der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache relevantes und verwertbares Wissen liefern können, um schädliches Verhalten besser zu verstehen. Unsere Methode besteht aus einem aufmerksamkeitsbasierten Bi-LSTM, das eine wettbewerbsfähige Leistung von 0,57 für die Subtask 1 erreichte. Im richtigen Prozess präsentieren wir auch Ablationsstudien über mehrere Einbettungen und deren Repräsentationsgrad und berichten darüber, welche Strategien wir verwendet haben, um das extreme Ungleichgewicht zwischen den Klassen zu verringern.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menjelaskan tawaran kami untuk tugas ekstraksi Semantik dari laporan keamanan Cyber. Tujuannya adalah untuk mengeksplorasi apakah metode proses bahasa alam dapat menyediakan pengetahuan relevan dan aktionabel untuk berkontribusi untuk memahami lebih baik perilaku jahat. Metode kami terdiri dari Bi-LSTM berdasarkan perhatian yang mencapai prestasi kompetitif 0,57 untuk Subtask 1. In the due process we also present ablation studies across multiple embeddings and their level of representation and also report the strategies we used to mitigate the extreme imbalance between classes.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 네트워크 안전 보고서의 의미 추출 임무에 대한 건의를 묘사했다.우리의 목표는 자연 언어 처리 방법이 관련되고 조작 가능한 지식을 제공할 수 있는지를 탐색하여 악의적인 행위를 더욱 잘 이해하는 데 도움이 되는 것이다.Dell의 접근 방식에는 하위 작업 1에서 0.57의 경쟁 성능을 제공하는 주의 기반 Bi LSTM이 포함됩니다.적당한 프로그램에서 우리는 여러 개의 삽입과 그 수준을 나타내는 융해 연구를 소개했고 클래스 간의 극단적인 불균형을 완화하는 전략을 보고했다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد خود را برای وظیفه اخراج سیمانتیک از گزارش\u200cهای محافظت سایر توصیف می\u200cکنیم. هدف این است که روش\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی می\u200cتواند دانش\u200cهای مربوط و فعال\u200cآوری را برای تولید کردن رفتار بدی به بهتر درک کند. روش ما از یک بی-LSTM بر اساس توجه است که به اجرای مسابقه 0.57 برای Subtask 1 رسید. در فرایند حق، ما همچنین تحقیقات فعالیت را در طول تعداد متعدد و سطح نمایش آنها نشان می دهیم و استراتژی\u200cهایی را که used to mitigate the extreme imbalance between classes گزارش می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunaelezea pendekezo letu kwa ajili ya jukumu la uteuzi wa kimapenzi kutoka kwenye Taarifa za usalama wa Mtandao. Lengo ni kutafuta kama mbinu za upasuaji wa lugha za asili zinaweza kutoa maarifa yanayohusiana na yanayofanya kazi ili kusaidia kuelewa tabia mbaya zaidi. Utawala wetu unajumuisha msimamo wa Bi-LSTM ambao ulifanikiwa ufanisi wa ushindani wa 0.57 kwa ajili ya ujumbe wa 1. Katika mchakato huo huo pia tunaweka tafiti za mabomu katika maeneo mbalimbali na kiwango cha uwakilishi na pia tunaripoti mikakati tuliyotumia kupunguza usawa wa hali mbaya kati ya darasa.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, Cybersecurity Reports'den Semantik Açmak üçin teklibimizi tassyklaýarys. Maksady, tebigy dil işleýän yöntemleri baglanşykly we işleýän bilim gowy düşünmekde kömekleşer. Biziň ýüregimiz 1-nji Subtask üçin 0.57 ýaryşykly etkinlik gazanýan Bi-LSTM diýilip bar. Iň sebäpli prosesde we köpüräk düzümleri we bellenenleriniň derejesini we klaslaryň arasynda ýok täsirini azaltmak üçin ulanan strategiýalarymyzy hem bildirip bilýäris.", 'af': 'In hierdie papier beskrywe ons voorstel vir die taak van Semantiese uitpakking van Sibersekuriteitsraporte. Die doel is om te ondersoek of natuurlike taal-prosesseringmetodes relevant en aksioneerbare kennis kan verskaf om beter te verstaan verkeerde gedrag te bid. Ons metode bestaan van â\x80\x99n aandag-gebaseerde Bi-LSTM wat gemeenskap effektuur van 0.57 bereik het vir die Subtask 1. In die regte proses voorsien ons ook ablasie studies oor veelvuldige inbêdings en hul vlak van voorstelling en rapporteer ook die strategies wat ons gebruik het om die ekstreme imbalans tussen klase te verminder.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, Cybersecurity Raportlarından Semantic Extraction Task üçün təklifimizi təsdiqləyirik. Məqsəd, təbiətli dil işləmə metodları pis davranışlarını daha yaxşı anlamaq üçün müvəffəqiyyətli və hərəkətli bilgi sağlayaraq istifadə etməkdir. Bizim metodumuz 1. Subtask üçün 0.57 ilə müqayisədi performansını başa çatdıran bi-LSTM-dən olub. Doğru süreçdə çoxlu inbinglər və onların təsiri arasında ablasiya təhsil edilməsini də göstərdik və həmçinin sınıf arasındakı aşırı müəyyən müqabiliyyəti azaltmaq üçün kullandığımız stratejilərə də xəbər veririk.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የሳሜንቲካዊ ደብዳቤዎችን ለማውጣት ስልጣንን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ጉዳዩ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀሚያ ሥርዓት ተቃውሞ እና ተግባራዊ እውቀትን ማቀናጃ እንዲችል ነው፡፡ የ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ-አ. በተለያዩ ፕሮግራም፣ በብዙ አካባቢዎች እና መልዕክታቸውን እናስቀራለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë propozimin tonë për detyrën e nxjerrjes Semantike nga Raportet e Sigurisë Kibernetike. Qëllimi është të eksplorojmë nëse metodat natyrore të përdorimit të gjuhës mund të ofrojnë njohuri të rëndësishme dhe të veprueshme për të kontribuar për të kuptuar më mirë sjelljen e keqe. Our method consists of an attention-based Bi-LSTM which achieved competitive performance of 0.57 for the Subtask 1.  Në procesin e duhur ne gjithashtu paraqesim studime ablacioni nëpërmjet përfaqësimeve të shumta dhe nivelit të përfaqësimit të tyre dhe gjithashtu raportojmë strategjitë që përdorëm për të lehtësuar disbalancën ekstreme midis klasave.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր առաջարկը կիբեռ-ապահովության զեկույցներից սեմանտիկ հանելու խնդրի համար: Նպատակը նպատակն է ուսումնասիրել, թե արդյոք բնական լեզվի վերամշակման մեթոդները կարող են տրամադրել նշանակալի և գործողական գիտելիք, որպեսզի օգնեն ավելի լավ հասկանալ չար վարքը: Մեր մեթոդը կազմված է ուշադրության վրա հիմնված Երբ-ԼՍԹՄ-ից, որը հասավ 0.57 մրցակցության արդյունքի Սենթախնդիր 1-ի համար: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք բազմաթիվ ներդրումների և նրանց ներկայացման մակարդակի ընթացքում աբլացիայի ուսումնասիրություններ, ինչպես նաև ներկայացնում ենք այն ռազմավարությունները, որոնք մենք օգտագործել էինք դասարանների միջև ծայրահեղ անհավասարակշռություն', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo svoj prijedlog za zadatak Semantičkog izvlačenja iz izvještaja o sajber sigurnosti. Cilj je istražiti da li prirodne metode obrade jezika mogu pružiti relevantne i aktivne znanje da bi doprinosili boljem razumijevanju zlonamjernog ponašanja. Naš metod se sastoji od pozornog Bi-LSTM-a koji je postigao konkurentnu funkciju od 0,57 za podzadatak 1. U dužnom procesu također predstavljamo ispitivanje ablacije preko višestrukih integracija i njihovog nivoa zastupanja i prijavljujemo strategije koje smo koristili za smanjenje ekstremne nelegalnosti između klasa.', 'ca': "In this paper, we describe our proposal for the task of Semantic Extraction from Cybersecurity Reports.  L'objectiu és explorar si els mètodes naturals de processament de llenguatges poden proporcionar coneixements rellevants i actionables per contribuir a entendre millor el comportament malicios. El nostre mètode consisteix en un Bi-LSTM basat en l'atenció que va aconseguir un rendiment competitiu de 0,57 per la Subtasca 1. En el proper procés també presentem estudis d'ablació a través de múltiples integracions i el seu nivell de representació i també informem de les estratègies que vam utilitzar per mitigar l'extrem desequilibri entre classes.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme náš návrh na úlohu sémantické extrakce ze zpráv o kybernetické bezpečnosti. Cílem je zjistit, zda metody zpracování přirozeného jazyka mohou poskytnout relevantní a užitečné znalosti, které přispějí k lepšímu porozumění škodlivému chování. Naše metoda se skládá z Bi-LSTM založeného na pozornosti, který dosáhl konkurenčního výkonu 0,57 pro Subtask 1. V rámci řádného procesu také prezentujeme ablační studie napříč více vloženími a jejich úroveň reprezentace a také popisujeme strategie, které jsme použili k zmírnění extrémní nerovnováhy mezi třídami.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সাইবার নিরাপত্তা রিপোর্ট থেকে সেম্যান্টিক বিদেশের কাজের জন্য আমাদের প্রস্তাব বর্ণনা কর উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার পদ্ধতি প্রযুক্ত এবং কার্যকর কর্মীদের জ্ঞান প্রদান করতে পারে কিনা তা খুঁজ আমাদের পদ্ধতি হচ্ছে একটি মনোযোগ-ভিত্তিক বিএলস্টিএম, যা সাবক্ষেত্র ১ এর জন্য প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা অর্জন করেছে। এই সঠিক প্রক্রিয়ায় আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং তাদের প্রতিনিধিত্বের স্তরে আগুনের গবেষণা উপস্থাপন করি এবং একই সাথে আমরা ক্লা', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldame oma ettepanekut küberjulgeoleku aruannetest semantilise väljavõtmise ülesandeks. Eesmärk on uurida, kas loodusliku keele töötlemise meetodid võivad anda asjakohaseid ja toimivaid teadmisi, et aidata paremini mõista pahatahtlikku käitumist. Meie meetod koosneb tähelepanupõhisest Bi-LSTM-ist, mis saavutas 1. alamülesande konkurentsivõime 0,57. Nõuetekohase protsessi käigus tutvustame ka ablatsiooniuuringuid mitme manustamise ja nende esindatuse taseme kohta ning anname teada ka strateegiatest, mida kasutasime klassidevahelise äärmise tasakaalustamatuse leevendamiseks.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme ehdotustamme kyberturvallisuusraporteista tapahtuvan Semanttisen purkamisen tehtävästä. Tavoitteena on selvittää, voidaanko luonnollisen kielen käsittelymenetelmät tarjota relevanttia ja käyttökelpoista tietoa haitallisen käyttäytymisen ymmärtämiseksi paremmin. Menetelmämme koostuu huomiopohjaisesta Bi-LSTM:stä, joka saavutti alitehtävässä 1 kilpailukyvyn 0,57. Oikeudenmukaisessa prosessissa esittelemme myös ablaatiotutkimuksia useista upotuksista ja niiden edustuksesta sekä raportoimme strategioista, joita käytimme vähentääksemme äärimmäistä epätasapainoa luokkien välillä.', 'jv': 'Nang pemilih iki, kita mudheng nggawe pawarno kanggo kelas semanti-extract nang Internet Tarjamahan punika ingkang disindelah kanggo ngerasai perusahaan ingkang pribadi, iso nggawe kesempatan karo awak dhéwé sing beraksi kanggo ngubah akeh luwih apik. Awakdhéwé wis ngerasakno ning bumi-bumi saben bi-LTT M sing rumangsa akeh barang 0.75 kanggo Subtask 1. Nang-procès ono langkung wigatinipun ingkang dipunangé karo mulasai perusahaan ingkang karo ingkang sampeyan karo ingkang dipunangé awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasai perusahaan langkung sampeyan karo hal kudu nggawe', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana buƙatanmu na wajen aikin da za'a zartar da Semantic daga Rapporten Sakamar Gogoa ne a jarraba idan metoden aiki na lugha na natsuwa za'a iya bãyar da ilim da muhimmi da wanda za'a ƙara wa mafiya fahimtar aikin sharri. Taimakonmu na kamfata da wani bincike-bincike Bi-LSM wanda ya sami aikin da za'a sãɓa 0.57 wa Subaikin 1. Kuma a cikin jarrabin da aka dace, za mu iya ƙididdige karatun masu cikin birai da daraja masu wakilishi, kuma tuna bayan yaƙin takiyayen da muka yi amfani da su ƙara balanci mai girma a tsakanin darajõji.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים את ההצעה שלנו למשימה של החולץ סמנטי מדווחי ביטחון סייבר. המטרה היא לחקור אם שיטות עיבוד שפת טבעיות יכולות לספק ידע רלוונטי ומפעיל כדי לתרום להבין טוב יותר התנהגות רעה. השיטה שלנו מורכבת מבוסס תשומת לב ב-LSTM אשר השיג ביצוע תחרותי של 0.57 עבור Subtask 1. בתהליך הנכון, אנחנו גם מציגים מחקרי ניתוח ברחבי תוכניות רבות ורמה היציגה שלהם, וגם דיווחים על האסטרטגיות שהשתמשנו כדי להקל על אי-איזון קיצוני בין כיסות.', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku opisujemo naš predlog za nalogo semantičnega izvlečevanja poročil o kibernetski varnosti. Cilj je raziskati, ali lahko metode obdelave naravnega jezika zagotovijo ustrezno in uporabno znanje, ki prispeva k boljšemu razumevanju zlonamernega vedenja. Naša metoda je sestavljena iz pozornosti osnovane Bi-LSTM, ki je dosegla konkurenčno zmogljivost 0,57 za podnalogo 1. V določenem postopku predstavljamo tudi študije ablacije več vdelav in njihovo stopnjo reprezentativnosti ter poročamo o strategijah, ki smo jih uporabili za ublažitev ekstremnega neravnovesja med razredi.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོའི་སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ཚན་གྱི་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེས་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་ཡོད། དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་དེ་ལྟར་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་Bi-LSTM་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། འདིས་0.57་རྣམས་གནད་དོན་ལས་གཞན་ཞིག་ མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དང་གནས་སྟངས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Digital Operatives at SemEval-2018 Task 8 : Using dependency features for malware NLP', 'ar': 'Digital Operatives في SemEval-2018 Task 8: استخدام ميزات التبعية للبرامج الضارة NLP', 'pt': 'Operadores Digitais no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 8: Usando recursos de dependência para NLP de malware', 'fr': 'Digital Operatives at SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 8\xa0: Utilisation des fonctionnalités de dépendance pour les logiciels malveillants NLP', 'es': 'Operativos digitales en SemeVal-2018 Tarea 8: Uso de funciones de dependencia para la PNL de malware', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク8のデジタル操作：マルウェアNLPへの依存機能の使用', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018任8之数作:恶意软件NLP用恃功', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 8 पर डिजिटल Operatives: मैलवेयर NLP के लिए निर्भरता सुविधाओं का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Цифровые операторы на SemEval-2018 Задача 8: Использование функций зависимости для вредоносных программ NLP', 'ga': 'Oibrithe Digiteacha ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 8: Gnéithe spleáchais a úsáid le haghaidh malware NLP', 'el': 'Ψηφιακοί Λειτουργοί στο έργο 8: Χρήση χαρακτηριστικών εξάρτησης για κακόβουλο λογισμικό', 'ka': 'დიზიტალური პერატიგები SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 8: NLP- ის გამოყენება განსაკუთრებული ფუნქციების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Digitális ügynökök a SemEval-2018 8. feladat: Függőségi funkciók használata rosszindulatú programokhoz NLP', 'it': 'Task 8: Utilizzo delle funzioni di dipendenza per i malware NLP', 'kk': 'Дижиталық оперативтер 8- тапсырмасында: NLP бағдарламалық NLP үшін тәуелдік мүмкіндіктерін қолдану', 'lt': 'Skaitmeninės veiklos vykdytojai pagal 2018 m. pusmetį 8 užduotis: netinkamų programų NLP priklausomybės savybių naudojimas', 'mk': 'Дигитални оперативи на SemEval-2018 задача 8: Користење на карактеристики на зависност за малопрема NLP', 'ms': 'Operatif Digital pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Menggunakan ciri-ciri dependensi untuk NLP malware', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 8- ലെ ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d: മാല്\u200dവെയര്\u200d NLP- നുള്ള ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Operattivi Diġitali f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 8: L-użu ta’ karatteristiċi ta’ dipendenza għal NLP ta’ malware', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8 дэх Дижитал Оперативууд: Malware NLP-ын хамааралтай байдлыг ашиглах', 'pl': 'Zadanie 8: Wykorzystanie funkcji zależności dla złośliwego oprogramowania NLP', 'no': 'Digitale operasjonar på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 8: Bruk avhengighetsfunksjonar for malvare NLP', 'sr': 'Digitalne operacije na zadatku 8: Koristenje karakteristika zavisnosti za malware NLP', 'ro': 'Agenții digitali la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 8: Utilizarea caracteristicilor de dependență pentru programele malware NLP', 'si': 'ඩිජිටල් ව්\u200dයාපාර්තාවක් සම්වේල්-2018 ව්\u200dයාපාර 8 වල: Malware NLP වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂතාවක් භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka Digital ee SemEval-2018 Shaqooyinka 8: Isticmaalidda ku xiran xirfadaha malware NLP', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 8- ல் இலக்கல் செயல்பாடுகள்:', 'sv': 'Digitala chefer på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 8: Använda beroendefunktioner för skadlig programvara NLP', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 8 میں ڈیجیٹل اپراتیوں: مالویر NLP کے لئے اعتباری ویٹیوں کا استعمال کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Kĩ thuật số thao tác tại SemEvdịch-thẩm 8: Dùng tính năng phụ thuộc cho độc tố NIchọc', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Използване на функции за зависимост за злонамерен софтуер', 'hr': 'Digitalni operativi na zadatku 8. poluvremeno-2018: korištenje karakteristika zavisnosti za malware NLP', 'da': 'Digitale medarbejdere på SemEval-2018 Opgave 8: Brug af afhængighedsfunktioner til malware NLP', 'nl': 'Digital Operatives bij SemEval-2018 Taak 8: Afhankelijkheidsfuncties gebruiken voor malware NLP', 'de': 'Digital Operatives at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Abhängigkeitsfunktionen für Malware nutzen NLP', 'id': 'Operatif Digital di SemEval-2018 Tugas 8: Menggunakan fitur dependensi untuk NLP malware', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 디지털 특수 공작 임무 8: 악성 소프트웨어 NLP에 대한 의존 기능 사용', 'fa': 'عملیات دیجیتالی در ماموریت ۸ نیم Eval-2018: استفاده از ویژگی بستگی برای NLP malware', 'sw': 'Wanaharakati wa kidijitali katika SemEval-2018 Task 8: Utumiaji wa kituo cha kutegemea vifaa vya NLP', 'tr': 'Dijital Operatýallar at SemEval-2018 Task 8: malware NLP üçin baglanylyk özelliklerini ullanýar', 'af': 'Digitale Operatives by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 8: Gebruik van afhanklikheid funksies vir malware NLP', 'sq': 'Operativat Digital në SemEval-2018 Task 8: Përdorimi i funksioneve të varësisë për malware NLP', 'am': 'ስራ 8:', 'hy': 'Թվային օպերատիվ՝ 2018 թվային կիսագնդի 8. գործընթացը. կախվածության առանձնահատկությունների օգտագործումը', 'bn': 'Digital Operatives at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Using dependency features for malware NLP', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 8: Malware NLP üçün bağlılıq xüsusiyyətlərini istifadə edir', 'bs': 'Digitalni operativi na zadatku 8. polovine-2018: korištenje karakteristika zavisnosti za malware NLP', 'ca': 'Operatives digitals a SemEval-2018 Task 8: Utilitzar característiques de dependencia en malware NLP', 'cs': 'Digitální operátoři na SemEval-2018 Úkol 8: Použití funkcí závislosti pro malware NLP', 'et': 'SemEval-2018 digitaalsed operatiivid Ülesanne 8: sõltuvusfunktsioonide kasutamine pahavara NLP jaoks', 'fi': 'Digital Operatives at SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 8: Riippuvuusominaisuuksien käyttäminen haittaohjelmien NLP:ssä', 'jv': 'Digital operatings at semiinval-2008 task 8: Using diphendisentance options for maliware NLP', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Digitalni operativci na SemEval-2018 Naloga 8: Uporaba funkcij odvisnosti za zlonamerno programsko opremo NLP', 'he': 'Digital Operatives at SemEval-2018 Task 8: Using dependency features for malware NLP', 'bo': 'གྲངས'}
{'en': 'The four sub-tasks of SecureNLP build towards a capability for quickly highlighting critical information from malware reports, such as the specific actions taken by a malware sample. Digital Operatives (DO) submitted to sub-tasks 1 and 2, using standard text analysis technology (text classification for sub-task 1, and a CRF for sub-task 2). Performance is broadly competitive with other submitted systems on sub-task 1 and weak on sub-task 2. The annotation guidelines for the intermediate sub-tasks create a linkage to the final task, which is both an annotation challenge and a potentially useful feature of the task. The methods that DO chose do not attempt to make use of this linkage, which may be a missed opportunity. This motivates a post-hoc error analysis. It appears that the annotation task is very hard, and that in some cases both deep conceptual knowledge and substantial surrounding context are needed in order to correctly classify sentences.', 'ar': 'تعمل المهام الفرعية الأربع لـ SecureNLP على بناء القدرة على تسليط الضوء بسرعة على المعلومات الهامة من تقارير البرامج الضارة ، مثل الإجراءات المحددة التي تتخذها عينة البرامج الضارة. تم تقديم المشغلين الرقميين (DO) إلى المهمتين الفرعيتين 1 و 2 ، باستخدام تقنية تحليل النص القياسية (تصنيف النص للمهمة الفرعية 1 ، ونموذج الإبلاغ الموحد للمهمة الفرعية 2). الأداء تنافسي على نطاق واسع مع الأنظمة الأخرى المقدمة في المهمة الفرعية 1 وضعيف في المهمة الفرعية 2. تخلق إرشادات التعليقات التوضيحية للمهام الفرعية الوسيطة ارتباطًا بالمهمة النهائية ، والتي تمثل تحديًا للتعليق التوضيحي وميزة مفيدة محتملة المهمة. لا تحاول الأساليب التي اختارتها إدارة العمليات الاستفادة من هذا الارتباط ، والذي قد يكون فرصة ضائعة. هذا يحفز تحليل الخطأ اللاحق. يبدو أن مهمة التعليق التوضيحي صعبة للغاية ، وفي بعض الحالات تكون هناك حاجة إلى المعرفة المفاهيمية العميقة والسياق المحيط الجوهري لتصنيف الجمل بشكل صحيح.', 'pt': 'As quatro subtarefas do SecureNLP são desenvolvidas para uma capacidade de destacar rapidamente informações críticas de relatórios de malware, como as ações específicas realizadas por uma amostra de malware. Operativos Digitais (DO) submetidos às subtarefas 1 e 2, utilizando tecnologia padrão de análise de texto (classificação de texto para a subtarefa 1 e um CRF para a subtarefa 2). O desempenho é amplamente competitivo com outros sistemas enviados na subtarefa 1 e fraco na subtarefa 2. As diretrizes de anotação para as subtarefas intermediárias criam uma ligação com a tarefa final, que é um desafio de anotação e um recurso potencialmente útil do a tarefa. Os métodos escolhidos pela DO não tentam fazer uso dessa ligação, o que pode ser uma oportunidade perdida. Isso motiva uma análise de erro post-hoc. Parece que a tarefa de anotação é muito difícil e que, em alguns casos, tanto o conhecimento conceitual profundo quanto o contexto envolvente substancial são necessários para classificar corretamente as sentenças.', 'es': 'Las cuatro subtareas de SecureLP se basan en una capacidad para resaltar rápidamente la información crítica de los informes de malware, como las acciones específicas que lleva a cabo una muestra de malware. Operativos Digitales (DO) enviados a las subtareas 1 y 2, utilizando tecnología de análisis de texto estándar (clasificación de texto para la subtarea 1 y un CRF para la subtarea 2). El rendimiento es ampliamente competitivo con otros sistemas presentados en la subtarea 1 y débil en la subtarea 2. Las pautas de anotación para las subtareas intermedias crean un vínculo con la tarea final, que es tanto un desafío de anotación como una característica potencialmente útil de la tarea. Los métodos que DO eligieron no intentan hacer uso de este vínculo, lo que puede ser una oportunidad perdida. Esto motiva un análisis de errores post-hoc. Parece que la tarea de anotación es muy difícil y que, en algunos casos, se necesita un conocimiento conceptual profundo y un contexto circundante sustancial para clasificar correctamente las oraciones.', 'fr': "Les quatre sous-tâches de SecureNLP permettent de mettre rapidement en évidence les informations critiques à partir de rapports de programmes malveillants, telles que les actions spécifiques entreprises par un échantillon de logiciel malveillant. Opérateurs numériques (DO) soumis aux sous-tâches 1 et 2, en utilisant la technologie standard d'analyse de texte (classification de texte pour la sous-tâche 1, et un CRF pour la sous-tâche 2). Les performances sont globalement concurrentielles par rapport aux autres systèmes soumis pour la sous-tâche 1 et faibles pour la sous-tâche 2. Les directives d'annotation pour les sous-tâches intermédiaires créent un lien avec la tâche finale, ce qui constitue à la fois un défi d'annotation et une fonctionnalité potentiellement utile de la tâche. Les méthodes choisies par le DO ne tentent pas d'utiliser ce lien, qui peut être une occasion manquée. Cela motive une analyse d'erreur post-hoc. Il apparaît que la tâche d'annotation est très difficile et que, dans certains cas, une connaissance conceptuelle approfondie et un contexte environnant substantiel sont nécessaires pour classer correctement les phrases.", 'zh': 'SecureNLP 四子务在速见恶意软件告中要信,如恶意软件示例行之特定。 数作人(DO)以准文析术(子职1文本分类与子职2通用告式)以给子事12。 子职1上,性比他统广竞争力,在子务2则弱。 中间子注则创与终任之链接,此既注挑战,亦职之潜有用也。 DO择术未尝试用此,盖失之机也。 此激发之后误析也。 注事似难,正分句,须厚其概上下文。', 'ja': 'SecureNLPの4つのサブタスクは、マルウェアサンプルによって実行される特定のアクションなど、マルウェアレポートから重要な情報をすばやく強調表示する機能に向けて構築されています。デジタルオペレーション（ DO ）は、標準的なテキスト分析技術（サブタスク1のテキスト分類、サブタスク2のCRF ）を使用して、サブタスク1とサブタスク2に提出されます。パフォーマンスは、サブタスク1で提出された他のシステムと広範囲に競争し、サブタスク2では弱い。中間サブタスクの注釈ガイドラインは、最終タスクへのリンクを作成します。最終タスクは、注釈チャレンジであり、タスクの潜在的に有用な機能です。DOが選択した方法は、このリンクを利用しようとしません。これは機会を逃した可能性があります。これにより、事後エラー分析が開始されます。注釈タスクは非常に難しいようであり、場合によっては、文章を正しく分類するために、深い概念的知識と実質的な周囲の文脈の両方が必要である。', 'ru': 'Четыре подзадачи SecureNLP строятся на возможности быстрого выделения критически важной информации из отчетов о вредоносных программах, таких как конкретные действия, предпринятые образцом вредоносного ПО. Цифровые операторы (DO), представленные в подзадачах 1 и 2, с использованием стандартной технологии анализа текста (классификация текста для подзадачи 1 и ОФД для подзадачи 2). Производительность в целом конкурентоспособна по сравнению с другими представленными системами по подзадаче 1 и слаба по подзадаче 2. Руководящие принципы, касающиеся аннотаций для промежуточных подзадач, обеспечивают увязку с конечной задачей, что является как проблемой, связанной с аннотациями, так и потенциально полезной особенностью задачи. Методы, которые выбрали DO, не пытаются использовать эту связь, которая может быть упущенной возможностью. Это мотивирует анализ апостериорных ошибок. Представляется, что задача аннотации очень сложна и что в некоторых случаях для правильной классификации предложений необходимы как глубокие концептуальные знания, так и существенный окружающий контекст.', 'hi': 'SecureNLP के चार उप-कार्य मैलवेयर रिपोर्ट से महत्वपूर्ण जानकारी को जल्दी से हाइलाइट करने की क्षमता की ओर बढ़ते हैं, जैसे कि मैलवेयर नमूने द्वारा की गई विशिष्ट कार्रवाइयां। डिजिटल ऑपरेटिव्स (डीओ) को उप-कार्य 1 और 2 में प्रस्तुत किया गया, मानक पाठ विश्लेषण तकनीक (उप-कार्य 1 के लिए पाठ वर्गीकरण, और उप-कार्य 2 के लिए एक सीआरएफ) का उपयोग करके। प्रदर्शन उप-कार्य 1 पर अन्य प्रस्तुत प्रणालियों के साथ मोटे तौर पर प्रतिस्पर्धी है और उप-कार्य 2 पर कमजोर है। मध्यवर्ती उप-कार्यों के लिए एनोटेशन दिशानिर्देश अंतिम कार्य के लिए एक लिंकेज बनाते हैं, जो एक एनोटेशन चुनौती और कार्य की संभावित उपयोगी विशेषता दोनों है। डीओ द्वारा चुने गए तरीके इस लिंकेज का उपयोग करने का प्रयास नहीं करते हैं, जो एक चूक अवसर हो सकता है। यह एक पोस्ट-हॉक त्रुटि विश्लेषण को प्रेरित करता है। ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि एनोटेशन कार्य बहुत कठिन है, और कुछ मामलों में वाक्यों को सही ढंग से वर्गीकृत करने के लिए गहरे वैचारिक ज्ञान और पर्याप्त आसपास के संदर्भ दोनों की आवश्यकता होती है।', 'ga': 'Cuireann na ceithre fho-thasc de chuid SecureNLP le cumas chun faisnéis chriticiúil ó thuarascálacha malware a aibhsiú go tapa, mar na gníomhaíochtaí sonracha a rinne sampla malware. Chuir Oibritheoirí Digiteacha (DO) isteach ar fhothasc 1 agus 2, ag baint úsáide as teicneolaíocht chaighdeánach anailíse téacs (aicmiú téacs d’fhothasc 1, agus CRF d’fhothasc 2). Tá an fheidhmíocht iomaíoch den chuid is mó le córais eile a chuirtear isteach ar fhothasc 1 agus lag ar fhothasc 2. Cruthaíonn na treoirlínte anótála do na fo-thascanna idirmheánacha nasc leis an tasc deiridh, atá ina dhúshlán nótaí agus ina ghné a d’fhéadfadh a bheith úsáideach de. an tasc. Ní dhéanann na modhanna a roghnaigh DO iarracht úsáid a bhaint as an nasc seo, rud a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ina deis caillte. Spreagann sé seo anailís earráide iar-hoc. Is cosúil go bhfuil an tasc anótála an-chrua, agus i gcásanna áirithe go dteastaíonn eolas coincheapúil domhain agus comhthéacs substaintiúil máguaird chun abairtí a rangú i gceart.', 'ka': 'SecureNLP-ის ოთხი სამუშაო დავალება შესაძლებელობისთვის, როგორც კრიტიკური ინფორმაციის შეცდომებისთვის, როგორც სპექტიკური მოქმედებები, რომლებიც მარქალური მონაცემებ დიზიტალური პერატიგები (DO პერფორმაცია უფრო კონსპექტიურია სხვა გადატანებული სისტემებით პირველი სამუშაო 1 და სხვა სამუშაო სამუშაო 2-ზე. საბოლოო დავალებისთვის მონიშნულების პროგრამეტრები საშუალო დავალებისთვის შექმნის დაკავშირება, რომელიც ორივე მონიშნულების გამოსახულება და პოტენციალურად გამოსახულებელი მეტოვები, რომლებიც DO ამოირჩევა, არ მოცდილობს გამოყენება ამ კავშირის გამოყენება, რომელიც შეიძლება იყოს შეუძლებელი შესაძლებლობა. ეს მოტივირდება post- hoc შეცდომის ანალიზაცია. თჱდლვზეა, ფვ თნჲრაუთწრა ვ მნჲდჲ რპსენა, ა გ ნწკჲთ ჟლსფათ ეყლბჲკჲ კჲნრვკუთწლნჲ ჱნანთვ თ მნჲდჲ მნჲდჲ ჲკლძფთრვლნჲ კჲნრვკჟრგჲ ვ ნსზეა, ჱა ეა ოპ', 'el': 'Οι τέσσερις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες του αναπτύσσονται προς την κατεύθυνση της γρήγορης επισήμανσης κρίσιμων πληροφοριών από αναφορές κακόβουλου λογισμικού, όπως οι συγκεκριμένες ενέργειες που λαμβάνονται από ένα δείγμα κακόβουλου λογισμικού. Ψηφιακοί Λειτουργοί (DO) που υποβάλλονται σε δευτερεύουσες εργασίες 1 και 2, χρησιμοποιώντας τυποποιημένη τεχνολογία ανάλυσης κειμένου (ταξινόμηση κειμένου για δευτερεύουσες εργασίες 1 και CRF για δευτερεύουσες εργασίες 2). Οι επιδόσεις είναι σε γενικές γραμμές ανταγωνιστικές με άλλα υποβαλλόμενα συστήματα σε δευτερεύουσα εργασία 1 και αδύναμες σε δευτερεύουσα εργασία 2. Οι κατευθυντήριες γραμμές σχολιασμού για τις ενδιάμεσες δευτερεύουσες εργασίες δημιουργούν μια σύνδεση με την τελική εργασία, η οποία είναι τόσο μια πρόκληση σχολιασμού όσο και ένα δυνητικά χρήσιμο χαρακτηριστικό της εργασίας. Οι μέθοδοι που επέλεξε δεν επιχειρούν να κάνουν χρήση αυτής της σύνδεσης, η οποία μπορεί να είναι μια χαμένη ευκαιρία. Αυτό παρακινεί μια μετα-hoc ανάλυση σφαλμάτων. Φαίνεται ότι η εργασία σχολιασμού είναι πολύ δύσκολη και ότι σε ορισμένες περιπτώσεις απαιτούνται τόσο βαθιά εννοιολογική γνώση όσο και ουσιαστικό περιβάλλον για να ταξινομηθούν σωστά οι προτάσεις.', 'hu': 'A SecureNLP négy alcsoportja arra a képességre épül, hogy gyorsan kiemelje a rosszindulatú programok jelentéseiből származó kritikus információkat, például egy rosszindulatú programminta által végrehajtott konkrét műveleteket. Szabványos szövegelemzési technológiát alkalmazó digitális üzemeltetők (DO) az 1. és 2. alcsoportra vonatkozó szövegosztályozás, a 2. alcsoportra vonatkozó CRF. A teljesítmény nagyjából versenyképes az 1. alcsoport más benyújtott rendszereivel, a 2. alcsoport esetében pedig gyenge. A köztes alcsoportokra vonatkozó jegyzetelési irányelvek összekapcsolást hoznak létre a végső tevékenységhez, ami egyszerre jegyzetelési kihívást jelent, és potenciálisan hasznos funkciót jelent a tevékenységnek. A DO által választott módszerek nem próbálják kihasználni ezt a kapcsolatot, ami lehet, hogy elszalasztott lehetőség. Ez indokolja a post-hoc hibaelemzést. Úgy tűnik, hogy a jegyzetelési feladat nagyon nehéz, és bizonyos esetekben mind mély fogalmi ismeretekre, mind lényeges környezeti kontextusra van szükség a mondatok helyes osztályozásához.', 'it': "I quattro sottocompiti di SecureNLP si basano sulla capacità di evidenziare rapidamente le informazioni critiche contenute nei report di malware, come le azioni specifiche intraprese da un campione di malware. Operatori digitali (DO) sottoposti ai sottocompiti 1 e 2, utilizzando una tecnologia standard di analisi del testo (classificazione del testo per la sottomissione 1 e un CRF per la sottomissione 2). Le prestazioni sono ampiamente competitive con altri sistemi presentati per la sottomissione 1 e deboli per la sottomissione 2. Le linee guida di annotazione per le sottoattività intermedie creano un collegamento con l'attività finale, che è sia una sfida di annotazione che una caratteristica potenzialmente utile dell'attività. I metodi che DO ha scelto non tentano di fare uso di questo collegamento, che potrebbe essere un'occasione persa. Ciò motiva un'analisi degli errori post-hoc. Sembra che il compito di annotazione sia molto difficile e che in alcuni casi sia una profonda conoscenza concettuale che un sostanziale contesto circostante siano necessari per classificare correttamente le frasi.", 'lt': 'Keturios „SecureNLP“ subužduotys grindžiamos gebėjimu greitai atkreipti dėmesį į kritinę informaciją, gautą iš klaidingos įrangos ataskaitų, pavyzdžiui, konkrečius klaidingos įrangos mėginio veiksmus. Digital Operatives (DO) submitted to sub-tasks 1 and 2, using standard text analysis technology (text classification for sub-task 1, and a CRF for sub-task 2).  Veiklos rezultatai iš esmės yra konkurencingi su kitomis pateiktomis sistemomis pagal 1 subužduotį ir 2 subužduotį yra silpni. Tarpinių subužduočių anotacijos gairės sukuria ryšį su galutine užduotimi, kuri yra ir anotacijos uždavinys, ir galimas naudingas uždavinio požymis. Pasirinkti DO metodai nesistengia pasinaudoti šia sąsaja, kuri gali būti prarasta galimybė. Tai motyvuoja post hoc klaidų analizę. It appears that the annotation task is very hard, and that in some cases both deep conceptual knowledge and substantial surrounding context are needed in order to correctly classify sentences.', 'kk': 'SecureNLP- тың төрт ішкі тапсырмалары, мәліметті бағдарламалардың мәліметтерінен тез бояулау мүмкіндігіне, мысалы, құрылғылар үлгісінің арнайы әрекеттері. Цифрлық оперативтер (DO) 1- мен 2- ішкі жоспарларға жіберілген, стандартты мәтін анализ технологиясы қолданылады (1- ішкі тапсырма үшін мәтін klasifikациясы және 2- ішкі тапсырма үшін Жұмыс істеу 1- тапсырма және 2- тапсырма үшін бақытты басқа жүйелерде жалпы жұмыс істейді. Артық ішкі тапсырмалар үшін жазбалардың бағыттаулары соңғы тапсырманың сілтемесін құрады. Бұл - жазбалардың жазбалары мен тапсырманың мүмкін пайдалы мүмкіндігі. DO таңдалған әдістер бұл сілтемені қолдану әрекетін көрмейді, бұл мүмкін жоқ болуы мүмкін. Бұл кейін қате анализиясын мотивациялады. Бұл жазбалардың тапсырмасы өте қиын деп ойлайды. Кейбір жағдайда, мәліметтерді дұрыс түрлендіру үшін дұрыс түрлендіру үшін дұрыс түрлендіру үшін қажет болады.', 'mk': 'Четирите подзадачи на SecureNLP се градат кон способност за брзо истакнување на критичките информации од извештаите за малопрема, како што се специфичните акции преземени од примерок на малопрема. Digital Operatives (DO) submitted to sub-tasks 1 and 2, using standard text analysis technology (text classification for sub-task 1, and a CRF for sub-task 2).  Резултатите се широко конкурентни со другите поднесени системи на подзадачата 1 и слаби со подзадачата 2. Наредниците за анотација за меѓувремените подзадачи создаваат врска со последната задача, која е предизвик за анотација и потенцијално корисна карактеристика на задачата. The methods that DO chose do not attempt to make use of this linkage, which may be a missed opportunity.  Ова мотивира пост-хок анализа на грешки. Изгледа дека задачата за анотација е многу тешка и дека во некои случаи се потребни длабоко концептуално знаење и значителен околни контекст за правилно да се класификуваат речениците.', 'ms': 'The four sub-tasks of SecureNLP build towards a capability for quickly highlighting critical information from malware reports, such as the specific actions taken by a malware sample.  Operatif Digital (DO) dihantar ke sub-tugas 1 dan 2, menggunakan teknologi analisis teks piawai (klasifikasi teks untuk sub-tugas 1, dan CRF untuk sub-tugas 2). Performance is broadly competitive with other submitted systems on sub-task 1 and weak on sub-task 2.  Arahan anotasi bagi sub-tugas sementara mencipta pautan ke tugas akhir, yang kedua-dua adalah cabaran anotasi dan ciri-ciri yang berpotensi berguna tugas. Kaedah yang DO pilih tidak cuba untuk menggunakan pautan ini, yang mungkin peluang yang hilang. Ini mendotivasikan analisis ralat post-hoc. Nampaknya tugas anotasi sangat sukar, dan dalam beberapa kes kedua-dua pengetahuan konseptual yang mendalam dan konteks sekeliling yang penting diperlukan untuk mengklasifikasikan kalimat dengan betul.', 'ml': 'മാല്\u200dവെയര്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള സുരക്ഷിതാവിന്\u200dറെ നാല് ഉപാധികള്\u200d പണിയുന്നതി ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d (DO) സബ് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും 1, 2 ക്കും നല്\u200dകിയിരിക്കുന്നു, സാധാരണ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് വിശ്വാസ സ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ ഉപയോഗിച്ചു് സബ്- ജോലിയില്\u200d മറ്റുള്ള സിസ്റ്റീമുകളോടൊപ്പം പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് വിശാലമാണ്. സബ്- ജോലി 2- ല്\u200d ബലഹീന ഇടയിലുള്ള സബ് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അവസാനത്തെ ജോലിയോടൊപ്പം ഒരു ബന്ധം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അതൊരു അഭിപ്രായകരമായ വ്യാല്\u200dക്കെല്ലും ജ DO തിരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത രീതികള്\u200d ഇത് പിന്നീട് ഹോക്ക് പിശക് പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. വിചാരിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാണെന്ന് തോന്നുന്നു. ചില കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ആഴത്തിലുള്ള അഭിപ്രായത്തിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളും കൂടുതല', 'mt': 'L-erba’ sottokompiti tas-SecureNLP jibnu lejn kapaċità biex tiġi enfasizzata malajr l-informazzjoni kritika mir-rapporti tal-malware, bħall-azzjonijiet speċifiċi meħuda minn kampjun tal-malware. Digital Operatives (DO) submitted to sub-tasks 1 and 2, using standard text analysis technology (text classification for sub-task 1, and a CRF for sub-task 2).  Il-prestazzjoni hija ġeneralment kompetittiva ma’ sistemi oħra sottomessi fuq is-sottokompitu 1 u dgħajfa fuq is-sottokompitu 2. The annotation guidelines for the intermediate sub-tasks create a linkage to the final task, which is both an annotation challenge and a potentially useful feature of the task.  Il-metodi li għa żlu DO ma jippruvawx jagħmlu użu minn dan ir-rabta, li tista’ tkun opportunità mitlufa. Dan jimmotiva analiżi ta’ żbalji post-hoc. It appears that the annotation task is very hard, and that in some cases both deep conceptual knowledge and substantial surrounding context are needed in order to correctly classify sentences.', 'mn': 'SecureNLP-ын дөрвөн суб-даалгавар зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн хэрэглэгдсэн үйл явцуудыг хурдан тодорхойлох боломжтой болгож байна. Дижитал Оперативууд (DO) 1 болон 2 суб-задалга руу дамжуулагдсан, стандарт текст шинжилгээний технологийг ашиглаж (1 суб-задалга руу текст хуваалцах, 2 суб-задалга руу CRF). Цаг үйл ажиллагаа нь 1-р суб-даалгаварын тухай бусад суб-даалгаварын тухай өрсөлдөг, 2-р суб-даалгаварын тухай бага байдаг. Хамгийн дундаж суб-даалгаварын даалгаврын захирал нь сүүлийн даалгаврын холбоо бий болгодог. Энэ нь даалгаврын сорилт болон ажлын магадлал ашигтай байдал юм. DO сонгосон арга нь энэ холбоотой холбоотой байдлыг ашиглахыг хичээдэггүй. Энэ нь алдагдсан боломж байж магадгүй. Энэ нь дараагийн алдаа гарсан шинжилгээнд урам зориг өгдөг. Зарим тохиолдолд ойлголтын мэдлэг болон орчин тойрон доторх нөхцөл байдлыг зөв хэлэхэд хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харагдаж байна.', 'no': 'Dei fire underoppgåvene i SecureNLP bygger mot ein kapasitet for rask markering av kritiske informasjon frå malvareporter, slik som dei spesifikke handlingane som er henta av eit malvare-prøve. Digitale operasjonar (DO) er sendt til underoppgåver 1 og 2 ved bruk av standardtekstanaliseteknologi (tekstklassifikasjon for underoppgåve 1 og ein CRF for underoppgåve 2). Utføringa er svært konkurrentivt med andre sendte systemar på underoppgåve 1 og kvit på underoppgåve 2. Retningslinjene for annotasjonane for mellom underoppgåver lagar ein lenkje til den siste oppgåva, som er både eit utfordring for annotasjonar og ein potensielt nyttig funksjon for oppgåva. Metodane som DO valt prøver ikkje å bruka denne linja, som kan vera ein feil mulighet. Dette motiverer ein post- hoc feilanalyse. Det ser ut til at notasjonsoppgåva er svært vanskeleg, og i nokre tilfelle både dype konseptuelle kunnskap og vanskelige omgivning er nødvendig for å rett klassifisera setningar.', 'pl': 'Cztery podzadania SecureNLP mają na celu szybkie wyświetlanie krytycznych informacji z raportów złośliwego oprogramowania, takich jak konkretne działania podejmowane przez próbkę złośliwego oprogramowania. Operatorzy cyfrowi (DO) zgłaszani do podzadań 1 i 2, przy użyciu standardowej technologii analizy tekstu (klasyfikacja tekstu dla podzadania 1, a CRF dla podzadania 2). Wydajność jest ogólnie konkurencyjna w porównaniu z innymi przedłożonymi systemami w podzadaniu 1 i słaba w podzadaniu 2. Wytyczne dotyczące adnotacji dla pośrednich podzadań tworzą powiązanie z ostatecznym zadaniem, które jest zarówno wyzwaniem adnotacyjnym, jak i potencjalnie użyteczną cechą zadania. Wybrane metody DO nie próbują wykorzystać tego powiązania, co może być przegapioną okazją. To motywuje do analizy błędów post hoc. Wydaje się, że zadanie adnotacyjne jest bardzo trudne i że w niektórych przypadkach do prawidłowej klasyfikacji zdań potrzebna jest zarówno głęboka wiedza koncepcyjna, jak i istotny kontekst otaczający.', 'ro': 'Cele patru subsarcini ale SecureNLP se dezvoltă spre o capacitate de evidențiere rapidă a informațiilor critice din rapoartele malware, cum ar fi acțiunile specifice întreprinse de un eșantion de malware. Agenții digitali (DO) supuși subsarcinilor 1 și 2, utilizând tehnologia standard de analiză a textului (clasificarea textului pentru subsarcina 1 și un CRF pentru subsarcina 2). Performanțele sunt, în general, competitive cu alte sisteme prezentate pentru subsarcina 1 și slabe pentru subsarcina 2. Orientările de adnotare pentru subactivitățile intermediare creează o legătură cu activitatea finală, care este atât o provocare de adnotare, cât și o caracteristică potențial utilă a activității. Metodele alese de DO nu încearcă să folosească această legătură, ceea ce poate fi o oportunitate ratată. Acest lucru motivează o analiză post-hoc a erorilor. Se pare că sarcina de adnotare este foarte dificilă și că, în unele cazuri, atât cunoștințe conceptuale profunde, cât și contextul înconjurător substanțial sunt necesare pentru a clasifica corect propozițiile.', 'sr': 'Četiri podzadataka SecureNLP izgradila se ka sposobnosti za brzo osvjetljenje kritičnih informacija iz izveštaja o malverama, kao što su specifična akcija poduzeta uzorak malvera. Digitalne operacije (DO) predate podzadatkima 1 i 2, koristeći standardnu tehnologiju analize teksta (klasifikacija teksta za podzadatak 1 i CRF za podzadatak 2). Izvrsnost je široko konkurentna sa drugim podignutim sistemima na podzadatku 1 i slabom na podzadatku 2. Upravnica za annotaciju prosječnih podzadataka stvara povezanost sa konačnim zadatakom, što je i izazov za annotaciju i potencijalno korisna karakteristika zadataka. Metode koje je DO izabrao ne pokušavaju iskoristiti ovu vezu, što bi moglo biti propuštena prilika. To motivira post-hoc grešku analizu. Izgleda da je zadatak za annotaciju veoma težak, i da su u nekim slučajevima potrebni i duboko konceptualno znanje i značajno okruženje konteksta kako bi ispravno klasifikovali rečenice.', 'si': 'SecureNLP ගේ සබ- වැඩක් හතරයි මැල්වේර් වාර්තාවෙන් විශේෂ තොරතුරු ගැන ඉක්මනින් විශේෂ තොරතුරු අවස්ථාවක් ලැබෙන්න ස ඩිජිටල් විශ්ලේෂණය (DO) 1 සබ- වැඩ 1 සහ 2 ලබාගත්තා, ස්ථායිත පාළුව විශ්ලේෂණ තාක්ෂණය භාවිතා කරනවා (සබ- වැඩ 1 සඳහා ප කාර්යාලය ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂයෙන් අනිත් පද්ධතියෙන් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතියෙන් සබ් වැඩ 1 සහ 2 වැ අන්තිම වැඩක් සබ් වැඩක් සඳහා අන්තිම වැඩක් සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් අන්තිම වැඩක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන DO තෝරාගෙන තියෙන විදියට මේ සම්බන්ධය පාවිච්චි කරන්න උත්සාහ කරන්නේ නැහැ, ඒක අවස්ථාවක් නැහැ. මේක පස්ස- හොක් දෝෂ විශ්ලේෂනයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා. ඒක පේන විදිහට පේන විදිහට වැඩක් ගොඩක් අමාරුයි, සමහර විදිහට ගොඩක් අභිවෘත දැනගත්ත දැනගත්ත දේවල් සමහර විදිහට ප්\u200dරත', 'sv': 'De fyra underuppgifterna i SecureNLP bygger mot en förmåga att snabbt markera viktig information från rapporter om skadlig kod, till exempel specifika åtgärder som vidtagits av ett prov på skadlig kod. Digitala verksamhetsutövare (DO) som omfattas av deluppgifterna 1 och 2 med hjälp av standardtextanalysteknik (textklassificering för deluppgift 1 och en CRF för deluppgift 2). Resultaten är i stort sett konkurrenskraftiga med andra inlämnade system för deluppgift 1 och svaga för deluppgift 2. Riktlinjerna för anteckningar för de mellanliggande underuppgifterna skapar en länk till den slutliga uppgiften, vilket både är en kommenteringsutmaning och en potentiellt användbar funktion i uppgiften. De metoder som DO valt försöker inte utnyttja denna koppling, vilket kan vara ett missat tillfälle. Detta motiverar en post-hoc felanalys. Det verkar som att kommenteringsuppgiften är mycket svår och att det i vissa fall behövs både djup begreppsmässig kunskap och betydande omgivande sammanhang för att korrekt klassificera meningar.', 'so': 'Afarta xafiiska ammaanka NLP waxay dhisaan awood aad dhaqso ugu caddeyso macluumaad muhiimka ah oo warqadaha barnaamijyada ah, tusaale ahaan falimaha gaarka ah oo sameynta barnaamijka lagu sameeyo. Digital Operatives (DO) waxay u dhiibeen shaqaalaha sub-fudud 1 iyo 2, isticmaalaya teknolojiyada baaritaanka qoraalka ah ee standard (text classification for sub-task 1, CRF for sub-task 2). Farshaxanku waa mid aad u khilaafsan yahay nidaam kale oo la soo dhiibay sub-task 1 iyo mid tabar yar oo ku saabsan sub-task 2. Hagaha la-talinta shaqada dhexe waxay sameeyaan xiriir la xiriira shaqada ugu dambeeya, taasina waa dhibaato la xiriiro iyo waxyaabo faa’iido leh oo u gaaraya shaqada. Midabka DO uu doortay ma isku dayaan in uu isticmaalo xiriirkan, taas oo laga yaabaa in fursad la’aan yahay. Tani wuxuu ku hagaajiyaa baaritaanka khaladda kadib. Waxa u muuqata in shaqadu aad u adag yahay, xaaladaha qaarkoodna waxaa loo baahan yahay aqoonta hoose ee fikrada iyo deegaanka ku wareegsan si loo si hagaagsan u kala qeybiyo.', 'ta': 'Name டிஜிட்டல் செயல்கள் (DO) துணை பணிகள் 1 மற்றும் 2 க்கு வழங்கப்பட்டது, நிலையான உரை ஆராய்வு தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத்தி (உ- செயல் 1 உரை வகைப்படுத்தல்,  செயல்பாடு துணை செயல் 1 மற்றும் துணை பணி 2 மீது பலவீனமான மற்றும் வழங்கப்பட்ட அமைப்புகளுடன் விரிவாக போராடும். The annotation guidelines for the intermediate sub-tasks create a linkage to the final task, which is both an annotation challenge and a potentially useful feature of the task.  The methods that DO chose do not attempt to make use of this linkage, which may be a missed opportunity.  இது பின் பிழை ஆராய்ச்சியை இயக்குகிறது. அறிவிப்பு செயல் மிகவும் கடினமாக இருக்கிறது மற்றும் சில நிலைகளில் ஆழமான கருத்து அறிவு மற்றும் பெரிய சுற்றும் சூழல் வாக்குகளை சர', 'ur': 'SecureNLP کے چار سوب-ٹاکس ایک قابلیت کی طرف بناتے ہیں مالویر راپوروٹ سے نہایت مطلوب معلومات کی جلدی ہیلایت کرنے کے لئے، جیسے ایک مالویر نمونہ کے ذریعہ مطلوب کے مطابق مخصوص اقدامات. ڈیجیٹل اپراتیوں (DO) 1 اور 2 Sub-Tasks پر مستقل کئے گئے، استاندارڈ ٹکسٹ تحلیل ٹیکنالوجی (Sub-Task 1 کے لئے ٹکسٹ کلسپی کرنا اور sub-task 2 کے لئے ایک CRF) استعمال کئے گئے۔ عملکرد اکثر دوسرے تحویل کی سیستموں کے ساتھ مختلف ہے سوب-ٹاکس ۱ پر اور سوب-ٹاکس ۲ پر کمزور ہے. میڈرین سوب-ٹاکس کے لئے اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا ارتباط پیدا کرتا ہے، جو ایک اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپن یہ طریقے جو DO نے منتخب کیے ہیں ان کی استعمال کرنے کی کوشش نہیں کرتی، یہ ایک گمراہ فرصت ہے۔ یہ ایک پوسٹ-هوک خطا تحلیل کی پیدائش کرتا ہے۔ یہ ظاہر ہوتا ہے کہ اظہار کا کام بہت سخت ہے، اور بعض مواقع میں جسم کا علم اور محیط محیط محیط ضرورت ہے کہ کلمات کو ٹھیک طریقے سے کلاس کریں.', 'uz': "Name Name Name Name @ info: whatsthis Name Tashqi vazifasi juda qiyin, va boshqa holatda juda juda juda juda qiziqarli g'oyalar va murakkablik xizmati kerak so'zlarni saqlash uchun.", 'vi': 'Bốn công việc phụ của SecureNLP xây dựng nhằm có khả năng tô sáng các thông tin quan trọng từ các báo cáo về virus, ví dụ như những hành động cụ thể của một mẫu virus độc. Công ty điện tử (DO) được giao nhiệm vụ phụ 1 và 2, sử dụng công nghệ phân tích văn bản chuẩn (phân loại văn bản cho nhiệm vụ phụ 1, và một CRF cho nhiệm vụ phụ 2). Thành quả có phần cạnh tranh với các hệ thống khác được gửi dưới nhiệm vụ 1 và kém trong nhiệm vụ phụ 2. Các hướng dẫn ghi chú cho các công việc phụ tạm thời tạo ra một kết nối với nhiệm vụ cuối cùng, đó là cả một thách thức ghi chú lẫn một yếu tố hữu ích của nhiệm vụ này. Cách mà DO chọn không cố sử dụng mối liên kết này, có thể là một cơ hội bị bỏ lỡ. Điều này thúc đẩy việc phân tích lỗi sau kì. Có vẻ như nhiệm vụ ghi chú rất khó khăn, và trong một số trường hợp, cả khả năng hiểu biết sâu và bối cảnh bao quanh cần thiết để phân loại các câu.', 'bg': 'Четирите подзадачи на изграждат възможност за бързо подчертаване на критичната информация от докладите за злонамерен софтуер, като например конкретните действия, предприети от извадка от злонамерен софтуер. Цифрови операции (ОП), представени на подзадачи 1 и 2, като се използват стандартни технологии за анализ на текста (класификация на текста за подзадача 1 и КРС за подзадача 2). Резултатите са широко конкурентни с другите представени системи по подзадача 1 и слаби по подзадача 2. Насоките за анотация за междинните подзадачи създават връзка с последната задача, която е едновременно предизвикателство за анотация и потенциално полезна характеристика на задачата. Методите, които са избрали, не се опитват да използват тази връзка, което може да бъде пропусната възможност. Това мотивира пост hoc анализ на грешките. Изглежда, че задачата за анотация е много трудна и че в някои случаи са необходими както дълбоки концептуални познания, така и съществен контекст, за да се класифицират правилно изреченията.', 'nl': 'De vier deeltaken van SecureNLP bouwen uit op een mogelijkheid om snel kritieke informatie uit malwarerapporten te markeren, zoals de specifieke acties van een malwaremonster. Digital Operatives (DO) ingediend aan deeltaken 1 en 2, met behulp van standaard tekstanalysetechnologie (tekstclassificatie voor deeltaak 1 en een CRF voor deeltaak 2). De prestaties zijn in grote lijnen concurrerend met andere ingediende systemen op subtaak 1 en zwak op subtaak 2. De annotatierichtlijnen voor de tussenliggende deeltaken maken een koppeling met de uiteindelijke taak, die zowel een annotatieuitdaging als een potentieel nuttig kenmerk van de taak is. De methoden die DO koos proberen niet gebruik te maken van deze koppeling, wat een gemiste kans kan zijn. Dit motiveert een post-hoc foutanalyse. Het lijkt erop dat de annotatietaak erg moeilijk is, en dat in sommige gevallen zowel diepe conceptuele kennis als substantiële omliggende context nodig zijn om zinnen correct te classificeren.', 'da': 'De fire underopgaver i SecureNLP bygger mod en mulighed for hurtigt at fremhæve vigtige oplysninger fra malware-rapporter, såsom de specifikke handlinger, der udføres af en malware-prøve. Digitale operationer (DO), der er underlagt underopgave 1 og 2 ved hjælp af standardtekstanalyseteknologi (tekstklassifikation for underopgave 1 og en CRF for underopgave 2). Resultaterne er stort set konkurrencedygtige med andre indsendte systemer for underopgave 1 og svage for underopgave 2. Retningslinjerne for anmærkninger for de mellemliggende underopgaver skaber en forbindelse til den endelige opgave, som både er en anmærkningsudfordring og en potentielt nyttig funktion i opgaven. De metoder, DO har valgt, forsøger ikke at gøre brug af denne forbindelse, hvilket kan være en forspildt mulighed. Dette motiverer en post-hoc fejlanalyse. Det ser ud til, at annotationsopgaven er meget svær, og at der i nogle tilfælde er behov for både dyb begrebsmæssig viden og betydelig omgivende kontekst for at klassificere sætninger korrekt.', 'hr': 'Četiri podzadataka SecureNLP-a izgradila se ka sposobnosti za brzo naglašavanje kritičnih informacija iz izvještaja o malverama, kao što su specifična akcija poduzeta uzorak malvera. Digitalne operacije (DO) podmetnute podzadatkima 1 i 2, koristeći standardnu tehnologiju analize teksta (klasifikacija teksta za podzadatak 1 i CRF za podzadatak 2). Učinnost je široko konkurentna s drugim podnosenim sustavima na podzadatku 1 i slabom na podzadatku 2. Upravnice za annotaciju za prosječne podzadatke stvaraju povezanost sa konačnim zadatkom, što je i izazov za annotaciju i potencijalno korisna karakteristika zadatka. Metode koje je DO izabrao ne pokušavaju iskoristiti ovu vezu, što može biti propuštena prilika. To motivira post-hoc pogrešku analizu. Čini se da je zadatak za annotaciju vrlo težak, i da su u nekim slučajevima potrebni i duboko konceptualno znanje i značajno okruženje konteksta kako bi ispravno klasifikirali rečenice.', 'de': 'Die vier Teilaufgaben von SecureNLP zielen darauf ab, kritische Informationen aus Malware-Berichten schnell hervorzuheben, z. B. die spezifischen Aktionen einer Malware-Probe. Digital Operatives (DO) werden den Teilaufgaben 1 und 2 unter Verwendung der Standard-Textanalysetechnologie (Textklassifizierung für Teilaufgabe 1 und CRF für Teilaufgabe 2) unterzogen. Die Leistung ist weitgehend wettbewerbsfähig mit anderen eingereichten Systemen auf Teilaufgabe 1 und Teilaufgabe 2. Die Annotationsrichtlinien für die Zwischenaufgaben erstellen eine Verknüpfung mit der endgültigen Aufgabe, die sowohl eine Annotationsherausforderung als auch ein potenziell nützliches Feature der Aufgabe ist. Die Methoden, die DO gewählt hat, versuchen nicht, diese Verknüpfung zu nutzen, was eine verpasste Gelegenheit sein könnte. Dies motiviert eine post-hoc Fehleranalyse. Es scheint, dass die Annotationsaufgabe sehr schwierig ist, und dass in einigen Fällen sowohl tiefes konzeptionelles Wissen als auch substanzielles Umfeld benötigt werden, um Sätze richtig einzuordnen.', 'ko': 'SecureNLP의 네 개의 하위 작업은 악성 소프트웨어 보고서에서 악성 소프트웨어 샘플이 취한 특정한 조작과 같은 관건적인 정보를 신속하게 강조하는 데 목적을 둔다.디지털 조작공(DO)은 표준 텍스트 분석 기술(텍스트 분류는 하위 작업 1, CRF는 하위 작업 2)을 사용하여 하위 작업 1과 2에 제출한다.하위 임무 1과 하위 임무 2에서 성능은 다른 제출된 시스템과 광범위한 경쟁력을 가진다.중간 하위 임무에 대한 주석 가이드는 최종 임무에 대한 링크를 만들었습니다. 이것은 주석 도전이자 임무의 잠재적인 유용한 기능입니다.선택한 방법은 이런 관계를 이용하려고 하지 않을 것이다. 이것은 잘못된 기회일 수도 있다.이것은 사후의 잘못된 분석을 불러일으킬 것이다.주석 임무는 매우 어려운 것 같다. 어떤 상황에서 문장을 정확하게 분류하기 위해서는 깊은 개념 지식과 대량의 주위 언어 환경이 필요하다.', 'fa': 'چهار زیر کار SecureNLP به سمت یک توانایی برای سریع تعلیم اطلاعات سنگینی از گزارش های malware، مانند عمل مخصوص که توسط نمونه های malware گرفته شده است، بسازند. عملیات دیجیتالی (DO) به زیر وظیفه ۱ و ۲ فرستاده شده، با استفاده از تکنولوژی تحلیل متن استاندارد (فرقه متن برای زیر وظیفه ۱ و CRF برای زیر وظیفه ۲). عملکرد با بقیه سیستم\u200cهای تحویل داده شده در زیر وظیفه ۱ و ضعیف در زیر وظیفه ۲ مسابقه است. هدایت یادآوری برای زیر کارهای بین\u200cالمللی یک ارتباط با کار نهایی ایجاد می\u200cکند، که هر دو یک چالش یادآوری است و یک ویژگی شاید مفید از کار است. روش\u200cهایی که DO انتخاب کرد سعی نمی\u200cکند از این ارتباط استفاده کند، که ممکن است فرصت گم شده باشد. این تحلیل خطای بعد هوک را انگیزه می\u200cکند. به نظر می رسد که کار اظهار اظهار خیلی سخت است، و در بعضی موارد هم علم عمیق و محیط محیط زیادی نیاز دارند تا به طور درست کلاس جمله\u200cها بگیرند.', 'id': 'Empat sub-tugas dari SecureNLP dibangun menuju kemampuan untuk memperlihatkan dengan cepat informasi kritis dari laporan malware, seperti tindakan spesifik yang diambil oleh sampel malware. Operatif Digital (DO) dikirim ke sub-tugas 1 dan 2, menggunakan teknologi analisis teks standar (klasifikasi teks untuk sub-tugas 1, dan CRF untuk sub-tugas 2). Performasi secara umum kompetitif dengan sistem lain yang dikirim pada sub-tugas 1 dan lemah pada sub-tugas 2. Arah anotasi untuk sub-tugas intermedi menciptakan hubungan dengan tugas akhir, yang kedua adalah tantangan anotasi dan fitur yang potensial berguna tugas. Metode yang DO pilih tidak mencoba untuk menggunakan hubungan ini, yang mungkin kesempatan yang hilang. Ini mendotivasi analisis kesalahan post-hoc. Tampaknya tugas anotasi sangat sulit, dan dalam beberapa kasus kedua pengetahuan konseptual dalam dan konteks lingkungan yang besar diperlukan untuk mengklasifikasi kalimat dengan benar.', 'sw': 'Mipango minne ya Usalama wa NLP hujenga uwezo wa kuonyesha taarifa muhimu kutoka kwenye taarifa za zana, kama vile vitendo maalum vilivyochukuliwa na sampuli ya vifaa vya zana. Operesheni za kidijitali (DO) zilitolewa kwenye kazi za subira 1 na 2, kwa kutumia teknolojia ya uchambuzi wa maandishi ya kawaida (usambazaji wa maandishi kwa ajili ya kazi ya subira 1 na CRF kwa ajili ya kazi ya subira 2). Utendaji unashindwa sana na mifumo mingine iliyotolewa kwenye jukumu la 1 na udhaifu katika kazi ya 2. The annotation guidelines for the intermediate sub-tasks create a linkage to the final task, which is both an annotation challenge and a potentially useful feature of the task.  njia ambazo DO imechagua hazijaribu kutumia kiungo hiki, ambacho kinaweza kuwa ni fursa isiyokosa. Hii inahamasisha uchambuzi wa makosa baada ya hoc. Inaonekana kuwa jukumu hili la kusikitisha ni ngumu sana, na katika baadhi ya matukio yanayotokana na maarifa ya kina na mazingira yanayozunguka yanahitajika ili kuhalalisha hukumu sahihi.', 'tr': 'SecureNLP nyşanlarynyň dört sub-zady malware hasaplardan çykyş maglumatlary ýagtylamak üçin bir ukyp taýýarlanýar. Dijital Operatifler (DO) 1 we 2 sub-tasklere gönderildi, standart metin analýşim teknolojisini ullanýar (sub-task 1 üçin metin klasifikasyon we sub-task 2 üçin bir CRF). Işkenlik 1-nji sub-işi bilen beýleki gönderilen sistemalar bilen döwletlikdir we 2-nji sub-işi bilen zayıf. Sub-taskler üçin ýazyklama düzlemleri soňky zada bir baglaýyş döreýär. Bu hem ýazyklama kynçysydyr hem zadyň mümkinçiliklidir. DO seçilen yöntemler bu bağlantı kullanmaya çalışmıyorlar. Bu yüzden kaçınmış bir fırsat olabilir. Bu sistemden soňra hata analyzasyny görkez Ýagtyrma täzisi örän kyndyr ýaly görünýär. Käbir ýagdaýda hem derin düşünüp bilgi hem etrap daşynda sözleri dogry klasifikasynda gerek bolýar.', 'af': "Die vier sub- taak van SecureNLP bou na 'n kapasiteit vir vinnige verligting van kritiese inligting van malware raporte, soos die spesifieke aksies wat deur' n malware voorbeeld geneem word. Digitale Operatives (DO) voorgestuur na sub- tasks 1 en 2, gebruik standaard teks analiseerde teknologie (teks klasifikasie vir sub- task 1, en 'n CRF vir sub- task 2). Voorwerp is brei gemeenskap met ander ingestuurde stelsels op subtaak 1 en swak op subtaak 2. Die annotasie gidsline vir die middelste sub- taak skep 'n verbinding met die eindelike taak, wat is beide 'n annotasie uitdrukking en 'n potensielle nuttige funksie van die taak. Die metodes wat DO gekies het doen nie probeer om gebruik te maak van hierdie koppeling, wat dalk 'n miskiede geleentheid wees. Hierdie motiveer 'n post- hoc fout analiseer. Dit verskyn dat die annotasie taak baie moeilik is, en dat in sommige gevalle diep konseptieële kennis en substantiewe omgewing konteks benodig word om te korrek klassifiseer teikens.", 'sq': 'The four sub-tasks of SecureNLP build towards a capability for quickly highlighting critical information from malware reports, such as the specific actions taken by a malware sample.  Digital Operatives (DO) i paraqitur nëndetyrave 1 dhe 2, duke përdorur teknologjinë standard të analizës së tekstit (klasifikimi i tekstit për nëndetyrën 1 dhe një CRF për nëndetyrën 2). Performance is broadly competitive with other submitted systems on sub-task 1 and weak on sub-task 2. Udhëzimet e anotacionit për nëndetyrat e ndërmjetësuara krijojnë një lidhje me detyrën përfundimtare, e cila është si sfida e anotacionit, ashtu edhe një funksion potencialisht i dobishëm i detyrës. Metodat që zgjodhën DO nuk përpiqen të përdorin këtë lidhje, e cila mund të jetë një mundësi e humbur. Kjo motivon një analizë gabimesh post-hoc. Duket se detyra e anotacionit është shumë e vështirë dhe në disa raste janë të nevojshme njohuri konceptuale të thella dhe konteksti thelbësor rreth saj me qëllim që të klasifikohen saktësisht fjalët.', 'am': 'የደኅንነት NLP አራቱ ደብዳቤዎችን ማነሳት የጠቅላቅ መረጃዎችን ከመስመር ወራት ፈጥኖ ለማሳየት የሚችሉትን አካሄዱ፤ እንደዚህ በመስመር ምሳሌ የተወሰዱትን የተቆጣጠሩን ድርጊቶች ነው፡፡ አዲስ ምርጫዎች ሁኔታ በተቃውሞ ስራ 1 እና በመስኮት 2 ላይ ደካማ ነው፡፡ የመካከለኛ ደብዳቤ አድራጊዎች መግለጫ የመጨረሻው ስራ ግንኙነት ይሠራል፤ ይህም የሚያስታወቂው ግንኙነት እና የስራ ግንኙነት የሚጠቅመው የስራ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ DO የመረጠው ሥርዓቶች የዚህን ግንኙነት ለመጠቀም አይሞክሩም፣ ይህ ስርዓት የተሳሳተ ነው፡፡ ይህ የፖስታ የስህተት አካላተር ያሳስፋል፡፡ ማስታወቂያው ስራ እጅግ አስቸጋሪ ነው፣ በተጨማሪም ጉዳይ የጥልቅ እውቀት እና በዙሪያው ያለውን አካባቢ እውቀት ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ավստահ ՆԼՊ-ի չորս ենթախնդիրները կառուցում են այնպիսի հնարավորություն, որ արագ ներկայացնեն սխալ ծրագրերի զեկույցների կարևոր տեղեկատվությունը, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ սխալ ծրագրի նմուշի կողմից վեր Առաջին և երկրորդ ենթախնդիրներին ներկայացված թվային գործողությունները օգտագործելով ստանդարտ տեքստի վերլուծության տեխնոլոգիան (1 ենթախնդիրների տեքստի դասակարգման և 2 ենթախնդիրների համար գոյություն ունեցող հիմնական հիմնական հիմնական հի Արդյունքը ընդհանուր առմամբ մրցակցում է այլ ներկայացված համակարգերի հետ 1-ի ենթախնդիրը և 2-ի ենթախնդիրը թույլ է: The annotation guidelines for the intermediate sub-tasks create a linkage to the final task, which is both an annotation challenge and a potentially useful feature of the task.  Այն մեթոդները, որոնք ընտրել են ԴՕ, չեն փորձում օգտագործել այս կապերը, ինչը կարող է լինել անտեսված հնարավորություն: Սա խթանում է սխալների վերլուծությունը հետո-հոք: Պարզվում է, որ annoտացիայի խնդիրը շատ դժվար է, և որոշ դեպքերում անհրաժեշտ են նաև խորը գաղափարական գիտելիքներ, ինչպես նաև շուրջը գտնվող կարևոր կոնտեքստներ, որպեսզի ճիշտ դասակարգում նախադա', 'bn': 'ম্যালওয়্যার রিপোর্ট থেকে দ্রুত গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্য উল্লেখ করার জন্য নিরাপত্তা এনএলপির চারটি সাব-কাজ নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে, যেমন ম ডিজিটাল অপারেটিভ (ডি) ১ এবং ২ সাব-কাজে জমা দিয়েছে, স্ট্যান্ডার্ড টেক্সট বিশ্লেষণ প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করেছে (সাব-কাজ ১ এবং সাব-কাজ সাব-কাজ ১ এবং সাব-কাজ ২-এ দুর্বল সিস্টেমের সাথে অন্যান্য প্রতিযোগিতার সাথে প্রতিযোগিতা করছে। মাঝামাঝি সাব-কাজের জন্য বিবেচনার নির্দেশ শেষ কাজের সাথে একটি লিঙ্ক তৈরি করে, যা একটি বিবেচনা চ্যালেঞ্জ এবং কাজের সম্ভাব্য কার্যকর ব DO নির্বাচিত পদ্ধতি এই লিঙ্ক ব্যবহারের চেষ্টা করে না, যা হয়তো হারিয়ে যাওয়া সুযোগ। এটি একটি পোস্ট-হোক-এর ত্রুটি বিশ্লেষণের উদ্দেশ্যে উৎসাহিত করে। মনে হচ্ছে এই বিরক্তিকর কাজ খুব কঠিন এবং কিছু ক্ষেত্রে গভীর ধারণার জ্ঞান এবং প্রান্তিক পরিচালনার প্রয়োজনীয় বিষয়টি সঠিকভাবে ব', 'ca': "Les quatre sub-tasques de SecureNLP construeixen cap a una capacitat de ressaltar ràpidament la informació crítica dels informes de malware, com les accions específices empreses per una mostra de malware. Digital Operatives (DO) submetits a subtasques 1 i 2, utilitzant tecnologia standard d'anàlisi de text (classificació de text per subtasca 1 i CRF per subtasca 2). Performance is broadly competitive with other submitted systems on sub-task 1 and weak on sub-task 2.  Les directrices d'anotació per les subtasques intermedies creen un vincle a la tasca final, que és tant un repte d'anotació com una característica potencialment útil de la tasca. Els mètodes que DO ha escollit no intenten utilitzar aquest enllaç, que pot ser una oportunitat perdida. Això motiva una anàlisi d'errors post-hoc. Sembla que la tasca d'anotació és molt difícil, i que en alguns casos són necessàries tant coneixements conceptuals profunds com contextes substancials al voltant per classificar correctament les frases.", 'az': "SecureNLP'in dörd apa işləri malware raporlarından kritik məlumatları tez işıqlandırmaq üçün yaradılır, məsələn malware nümunələrindən alınan xüsusi işlər kimi. Digital Operativlər (DO) 1 və 2 sub-tasklərə göndərildi, standart metin analizi teknolojisini istifadə edir (1 sub-task klasifikasyonu və 2 sub-task üçün CRF). İşliyyat 1-si ilə başqa göndərilmiş sistemlərlə çox müqayisədir və 2-si ilə zəifdir. Ara-orta sub-tasklərin məlumatlarının məlumatlarına bağlantısı yaradır, bu da məlumatların məlumatları və mümkün olaraq faydalı bir tərzidir. DO seçdiyi metodlar bu bağlantıyı istifadə etməyə çalışmırlar, ki bu xətasız fərqi olar. Bu, post-hoc xəta analizi təşkil edir. Görünür ki, annotasyon işləri çox çətin və bəzi vaxtlarda hər ikisi dərin düşüncəli bilgi və ətrafındakı məsələlər düzgün sözləri dəyişdirmək üçün ehtiyacı vardır.", 'bs': 'Četiri podzadataka SecureNLP-a izgradila se ka sposobnosti za brzo osvjetljenje kritičnih informacija iz izvještaja o malverama, kao što su specifična akcija poduzeta uzorak malvera. Digitalne operacije (DO) predate podzadatkima 1 i 2, koristeći standardne tehnologije analize teksta (klasifikacija teksta za podzadatak 1 i CRF za podzadatak 2). Učinnost je široko konkurentna sa drugim podnosenim sistemima na podzadatku 1 i slabom na podzadatku 2. Upravnice za annotaciju za prosječne podzadatke stvaraju vezu sa konačnim zadatkom, što je i izazov za annotaciju i potencijalno korisna karakteristika zadatka. Metode koje je DO izabrao ne pokušavaju iskoristiti ovu vezu, što bi moglo biti propuštena prilika. To motivira post-hoc grešku analizu. Čini se da je zadatak za annotaciju veoma težak, i da su u nekim slučajevima potrebni i duboko konceptualno znanje i značajno okruženje konteksta kako bi se ispravno klasifikirala rečenice.', 'cs': 'Čtyři dílčí úkoly aplikace SecureNLP vytvářejí možnost rychlého zvýraznění kritických informací ze zpráv malwaru, jako jsou konkrétní akce přijaté vzorkem malwaru. Digitální operátoři (DO) předkládaní do dílčích úkolů 1 a 2 pomocí standardní technologie analýzy textu (klasifikace textu pro dílčí úkol 1 a CRF pro dílčí úkol 2). Výkon je obecně konkurenceschopný vůči ostatním předloženým systémům na podúkolu 1 a slabý na podúkolu 2. Pokyny pro anotaci pro meziúkoly vytvářejí vazbu na konečný úkol, který je jak výzvou pro anotaci, tak potenciálně užitečnou funkcí úkolu. Metody, které DO zvolil, se nesnaží využít tohoto propojení, což může být promeškaná příležitost. To motivuje post-hoc analýzu chyb. Zdá se, že anotace je velmi náročná a že pro správné klasifikaci vět je v některých případech potřeba hluboké konceptuální znalosti i podstatný okolní kontext.', 'et': 'SecureNLP neli allülesannet on võimalik kiiresti esile tuua pahavara aruannetest saadud kriitilist teavet, näiteks pahavara näidise konkreetsed meetmed. 1. ja 2. alamülesannetele esitatud digitaalsed operatiivtööd, kasutades standardset tekstianalüüsi tehnoloogiat (1. alamülesande teksti klassifitseerimine ja 2. alamülesande CRF). Tulemused on üldiselt konkurentsivõimelised muude esitatud süsteemidega 1. alamülesande puhul ja nõrgad 2. alamülesande puhul. Vaheülesannete annoteerimisjuhised loovad seose lõpliku ülesandega, mis on nii annoteerimisprobleem kui ka ülesande potentsiaalselt kasulik omadus. Meetodid, mille DO valis, ei püüa seda seost ära kasutada, mis võib olla kasutamata jäänud võimalus. See motiveerib veaanalüüsi. Tundub, et annoteerimise ülesanne on väga raske ja mõnel juhul on lausete õigeks klassifitseerimiseks vaja nii sügavaid kontseptuaalseid teadmisi kui ka olulist ümbritsevat konteksti.', 'fi': 'SecureNLP:n neljä osatehtävää kehittävät kykyä tuoda nopeasti esiin haittaohjelmaraporteista saatavat kriittiset tiedot, kuten haittaohjelmanäytteen toteuttamat erityistoimet. Osatehtäviin 1 ja 2 toimitetut digitaaliset operatiiviset toimijat käyttäen vakiomuotoista tekstianalyysitekniikkaa (osatehtävän 1 tekstiluokitus ja osatehtävän 2 tekstiluokitus). Suorituskyky on yleisesti ottaen kilpailukykyinen muiden toimitettujen järjestelmien kanssa osatehtävässä 1 ja heikko osatehtävässä 2. Väliosatehtävien huomautusohjeet luovat linkin lopulliseen tehtävään, joka on sekä huomautushaste että tehtävän mahdollisesti hyödyllinen ominaisuus. DO:n valitsemat menetelmät eivät yritä hyödyntää tätä yhteyttä, mikä voi olla menetetty tilaisuus. Tämä motivoi tapauskohtaista virheanalyysiä. Vaikuttaa siltä, että huomautustehtävä on hyvin vaikea ja että joissakin tapauksissa lauseiden oikean luokittelun kannalta tarvitaan sekä syvällistä käsitteellistä tietämystä että sitä ympäröivää kontekstia.', 'jv': 'Sub-tasks sing sekuriNLP mbukake nggawe kapan kanggo nguasai informasi priester kanggo titik dhéwé éntuk kang alat-alat, kaya aksi wis dipolete operasi sing sampek maliware Digital operatings (DO) sent to Sub-tasks 1 and 2, use Standard text testing method (text category for Sub-task 1, and a CIF for Sub-task 2). Care Attribute Awak dhéwé éntuk DO nggih ora bisa nguasai ngéwangi iki, supoyo iso diandelaké opotinikan. Sampeyan nganggo sampeyan After-Hoc Rusak Tulung pinggang-pinggang langkung sapa adalah gak tenan lan ngono kuwi cah-cah dumadhi kaalangkung ngerasahan ingkang dipun-ingkang dipun ajeng-ingkang dipun.', 'ha': "Kiran taskõki na Safe NLP ya gina zuwa wani abinci wa ya haraka ka nuna wa information na muhimu daga akan warware ɗin, kamar misãlin aikin da aka kashe misali mai zartar da su. KCharselect unicode block name Performance is broadly competitive with other sourced system on sub-aikin 1 and rauni on sub-aikin 2. Shiryarwa na sanarwa wa task õkin masu tsakanin taskõki, za'a sami wata linki zuwa aikin na ƙarshen, wanda ya zama rabon zane da kuma yana da wani amfani mai yiwuwa ga aikin. Shiryoyin da YO Ya zãɓe ba za su yi amfani da wannan linki ba, kan an kasa da wata fursa. Wannan yana motsa wani analũri na baka-hoc. Aka gane aikin zartar da shi mai tsanani ne, kuma a cikin wani abu, za'a buƙata fahimta guda da matsayin wanda ke gẽfen shi mai girma dõmin ya ƙayyade gafukan gaskiya.", 'sk': 'Štiri podnaloge programa SecureNLP gradijo v smeri zmožnosti hitrega poudarjanja kritičnih informacij iz poročil o zlonamerni programski opremi, kot so posebni ukrepi, ki jih sprejme vzorec zlonamerne programske opreme. Digitalni operativni dejavniki, predloženi podnalogam 1 in 2 z uporabo standardne tehnologije analize besedila (klasifikacija besedila za podnalogo 1 in CRF za podnalogo 2). Uspešnost je na splošno konkurenčna z drugimi predloženimi sistemi pri podnalogi 1 in šibka pri podnalogi 2. Smernice za opombe za vmesna podopravila ustvarjajo povezavo s končnim opravilom, ki je tako izziv za opombe kot potencialno uporabna funkcija opravila. Metode, ki so jih izbrali DO, ne poskušajo izkoristiti te povezave, kar je lahko zamujena priložnost. To spodbuja post hoc analizo napak. Zdi se, da je naloga označevanja zelo težka in da sta v nekaterih primerih za pravilno razvrstitev stavkov potrebna tako globoko konceptualno znanje kot obsežen okoliški kontekst.', 'he': 'ארבעה התפקידים של SecureNLP בונים לכיוון יכולת להדגיש במהירות מידע קריטי מדווחים של תכונות רעות, כמו פעולות ספציפיות שנלקחו על ידי דגימת תכונות רעות. פעילות דיגיטליות (DO) שנשלחו לתפקידים 1 ו-2, בשימוש בטכנולוגיה ניתוח טקסט סטנדרטית (מסווג טקסט לתפקיד 1, ו-CRF לתפקיד 2). ההופעה תחרותית באופן כללי עם מערכות נוספות על תחת משימה 1 וחלשה על תחת משימה 2. המדרכים של הערות לתפקידים התיכוניים יוצרים קשר למשימה הסופית, שזו גם אתגר הערות והתכונה פוטנציאלית שימושית של המשימה. השיטות שבחרו DO לא מנסים להשתמש בקשר הזה, שאולי זו הזדמנות חסרה. זה מניע ניתוח שגיאות לאחר ההוקו. It appears that the annotation task is very hard, and that in some cases both deep conceptual knowledge and substantial surrounding context are needed in order to correctly classify sentences.', 'bo': 'The four sub-tasks of SecureNLP build towards a capability for quickly highlighting critical information from malware reports, such as the specific actions taken by a malware sample. Digital Operatives (DO) submitted to sub-tasks 1 and 2, using standard text analysis technology (text classification for sub-task 1, and a CRF for sub-task 2). རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནི་ལག་ལེན་པ་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ཕན་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་གཞན་དང་ཕན་མེད་དུས་ལས་ཕན་ལས་ཀྱང་༢ The annotation guidelines for the intermediate sub-tasks create a linkage to the final task, which is both an annotation challenge and a potentially useful feature of the task. DO་གདམ་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་འདིའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་མི་བྱེད་པར་ལྟ་བྱེད་དགོས། འདིས་རྗེས་ཀྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། བཀོལ་སྲིད་བྱ་ཚིག་དེ་སྟབས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་། སྐབས་ཁ་ཤས་ནང་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་སྦྲེལ་བའི་ཁྲོད་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ'}
{'en': 'SJTU-NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 9 : Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings', 'ar': 'SJTU-NLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 9: اكتشاف التشعب العصبي مع تضمين المصطلحات', 'fr': "SJTU-NLP au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 9\xa0: Découverte de l'hypernomie neurale avec intégration de termes", 'pt': 'SJTU-NLP na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 9: Descoberta de hiperônimos neurais com incorporação de termos', 'es': 'SJTU-NLP en SemEval-2018 Tarea 9: Descubrimiento de hipernemas neuronales con incrustaciones de términos', 'ja': 'SJTU - NLP at SemEval -2018 Task 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings', 'zh': 'SJTU-NLP at SemEval-2018 务9:用术语嵌神经超名词', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 9 पर SJTU-NLP: शब्द एम्बेडिंग के साथ तंत्रिका हाइपरनिम डिस्कवरी', 'ru': 'SJTU-NLP на SemEval-2018 Задача 9: Обнаружение нейронного гипернима с внедрением терминов', 'ga': 'SJTU-NLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 9: Fionnachtain Hipirainm Néarach le Leabú Téarma', 'ka': 'QXml', 'el': 'Εργασία 9: Ανακαίνιση νευρωνικών υπερνύμων με ενσωμάτωση όρων', 'lt': 'SJTU-NLP 2010–2018 m. pusėje 9 užduotis: neurologinio hipernimo aptikimas su terminų įdėjimais', 'hu': 'SJTU-NLP a SemEval-2018 9. feladat: Neurális hiperním felfedezése kifejezési beágyazásokkal', 'it': 'SJTU-NLP al SemEval-2018 Task 9: Scoperta di Ipernimi Neurali con Embedding Term', 'kk': 'SJTU- NLP жарым- 2018 тапсырмасы 9: Термені ендіру үшін нейрондық гиперним тапсырмасы', 'mk': 'SJTU-NLP на SemEval-2018 задача 9: Откривање на неурални хиперними со вклопување на термини', 'mt': 'SJTU-NLP f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 9: Skoperta ta’ Ipernim Newrali b’Embeddings Term', 'ms': 'SJTU-NLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 9: Penyelidikan Hipernim Neural dengan Pencampuran Terma', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 9-ല്\u200d SJTU-NLP: ടെര്\u200dമിന്\u200d എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളുമായി നെയുറല്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിമ ഡിസ്ക്വറി', 'no': 'SJTU-NLP ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 9: Neuralhypernymoppdaging med termininnbygging', 'pl': 'SJTU-NLP w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 9: Wykrycie hipernimu nerwowego z osadzeniem terminów', 'mn': 'SJTU-NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings', 'sr': 'SJTU-NLP na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 9: Neuralno hipernim otkrivanje sa terminovima', 'ro': 'SJTU-NLP la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 9: Descoperirea hipernimului neural cu încorporarea termenilor', 'so': 'SJTU-NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings', 'sv': 'SJTU-NLP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery med terminbäddningar', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 செயல் 9- ல் SJTU- NLP: முடிவு உடைந்துள்ளதுடன் நெயுரல் ஹைப்பர்னி கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'SJTU-NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings', 'uz': '9. Vazifani SemEval- 2018 bilan SJTU-NLP: Term tuzuvlari bilan neyural Hypernym Discovery', 'vi': 'SJTCU-NLP tại Semkhai-208 Task 9: Neual Hypernym Disco with term Embedings', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Откриване на неврални хиперними с вграждания на термини', 'da': 'SJTU-NLP ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 9: Neural Hypernym opdagelse med termindlejringer', 'nl': 'SJTU-NLP bij SemEval-2018 Taak 9: Neurale Hyperniem Discovery met Term Embeddings', 'hr': 'SJTU-NLP na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 9: Neuralno hipernimu otkrivanje s uvođenjem termina', 'id': 'SJTU-NLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 9: Penyelidikan Hypernim Neural dengan Pencampuran Term', 'de': 'SJTU-NLP bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 9: Neuronale Hypernyme mit Term Embeddings entdecken', 'ko': 'SJTU-NLP가SemEval-18 작업9: 용어에 박힌 신경 초음어 발견', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'SJTU-NLP katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 9: Tambulio la Ki-Hypernym la Tamko la Mimba', 'tr': 'SJTU-NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings', 'af': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'sq': 'SJTU-NLP në SemEval-2018 Task 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'ስራ 9', 'az': 'SJTU-NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৯-এ SJTU-NLP: টার্ম এমবেডিং দিয়ে নিউরেল হাইপার্নিম ডিস্কোরি', 'ca': 'SJTU-NLP a SemEval-2018 Task 9: Discovery Neural Hypernym with Term Embeddings', 'cs': 'SJTU-NLP na SemEval-2018 Úkol 9: Zjištění neuronových hypernymů s termínovými vloženími', 'bs': 'SJTU-NLP na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 9: Neuralno hipernim otkrivanje sa terminovima', 'fi': 'SJTU-NLP SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 9: Neuraalisten hypernyymien löytäminen termien upotuksilla', 'et': 'SJTU-NLP SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 9: Neuraalse hüpernüümi avastamine terminite manustamisega', 'jv': 'sjT', 'sk': 'SJTU-NLP na SemEval-2018 naloga 9: odkrivanje nevronskih hipernimov z vdelavami izrazov', 'he': 'SJTU-NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion', 'bo': 'SJTU-NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 9: Neural Hypernym Discovery with Term Embeddings'}
{'en': 'This paper describes a hypernym discovery system for our participation in the SemEval-2018 Task 9, which aims to discover the best (set of) candidate hypernyms for input concepts or entities, given the search space of a pre-defined vocabulary. We introduce a neural network architecture for the concerned task and empirically study various neural network models to build the representations in latent space for words and phrases. The evaluated models include convolutional neural network, long-short term memory network, gated recurrent unit and recurrent convolutional neural network. We also explore different embedding methods, including word embedding and sense embedding for better performance.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام اكتشاف hypernym لمشاركتنا في SemEval-2018 Task 9 ، والتي تهدف إلى اكتشاف أفضل (مجموعة) من الكلمات الترشيحية لمفاهيم أو كيانات الإدخال ، بالنظر إلى مساحة البحث لمفردات محددة مسبقًا. نقدم بنية الشبكة العصبية للمهمة المعنية وندرس تجريبيًا نماذج الشبكات العصبية المختلفة لبناء التمثيلات في الفضاء الكامن للكلمات والعبارات. تشمل النماذج التي تم تقييمها الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية ، وشبكة الذاكرة طويلة المدى ، والوحدة المتكررة ذات البوابات ، والشبكة العصبية التلافيفية المتكررة. نستكشف أيضًا طرق تضمين مختلفة ، بما في ذلك تضمين الكلمات وتضمين المعنى لتحقيق أداء أفضل.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit un système de découverte d'hyperonymes pour notre participation à la tâche 9 de SEMEVAL-2018, qui vise à découvrir le meilleur (ensemble de) hyperonymes candidats pour des concepts ou des entités d'entrée, compte tenu de l'espace de recherche d'un vocabulaire prédéfini. Nous introduisons une architecture de réseau neuronal pour la tâche concernée et étudions de manière empirique divers modèles de réseaux neuronaux afin de construire les représentations dans l'espace latent pour les mots et les phrases. Les modèles évalués comprennent un réseau neuronal convolutif, un réseau de mémoire à long terme à court terme, une unité récurrente déclenchée et un réseau neuronal convolutif récurrent. Nous explorons également différentes méthodes d'intégration, y compris l'intégration de mots et l'intégration de sens pour de meilleures performances.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe un sistema de descubrimiento de hiperónimos para nuestra participación en la Tarea 9 de SemEval-2018, que tiene como objetivo descubrir los mejores (el conjunto de) hiperónimos candidatos para conceptos o entidades de entrada, dado el espacio de búsqueda de un vocabulario predefinido. Introducimos una arquitectura de red neuronal para la tarea en cuestión y estudiamos empíricamente varios modelos de redes neuronales para construir las representaciones en el espacio latente de palabras y frases. Los modelos evaluados incluyen red neuronal convolucional, red de memoria a corto plazo, unidad recurrente cerrada y red neuronal convolucional recurrente. También exploramos diferentes métodos de incrustación, incluida la incrustación de palabras y la incrustación de sentidos para un mejor rendimiento.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve um sistema de descoberta de hiperônimos para nossa participação na Tarefa 9 do SemEval-2018, que visa descobrir o melhor (conjunto de) hiperônimos candidatos para conceitos ou entidades de entrada, dado o espaço de busca de um vocabulário pré-definido. Introduzimos uma arquitetura de rede neural para a tarefa em questão e estudamos empiricamente vários modelos de rede neural para construir as representações no espaço latente para palavras e frases. Os modelos avaliados incluem rede neural convolucional, rede de memória de longo prazo, unidade recorrente fechada e rede neural convolucional recorrente. Também exploramos diferentes métodos de incorporação, incluindo incorporação de palavras e incorporação de sentido para melhor desempenho.', 'ja': '本稿では、あらかじめ定義された語彙の検索スペースを考慮して、入力概念またはエンティティのための最良の（一連の）候補ハイパーニムを発見することを目的とした、SemEval -2018タスク9への参加のためのハイパーニム発見システムについて説明する。関連するタスクのためのニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを導入し、さまざまなニューラルネットワークモデルを経験的に研究して、単語やフレーズの潜在的な空間で表現を構築します。評価されたモデルには、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク、長期記憶ネットワーク、ゲート型再帰ユニット、及び再帰畳み込みニューラルネットワークが含まれる。また、ワード埋め込みやセンス埋め込みなど、さまざまな埋め込み方法を模索し、パフォーマンスを向上させています。', 'zh': '本文述臣等预SemEval-2018 Task 9超名词见系统,该系统旨在据预定义词汇搜索空间,为输其实体得最佳(一组)候选超名词。 引入神经网络架构,实究群神经网络,以潜构单词短语。 评估模卷积神经网络、长短期记网络、门控递归单元、递归卷积神经网络。 又探其异者,词嵌义嵌,以得其性。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 टास्क 9 में हमारी भागीदारी के लिए एक हाइपरनिम डिस्कवरी सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है, जिसका उद्देश्य इनपुट अवधारणाओं या संस्थाओं के लिए सबसे अच्छा (सेट) उम्मीदवार हाइपरनिम्स की खोज करना है, जो पूर्व-परिभाषित शब्दावली के खोज स्थान को देखते हुए। हम संबंधित कार्य के लिए एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर पेश करते हैं और शब्दों और वाक्यांशों के लिए अव्यक्त स्थान में प्रतिनिधित्व बनाने के लिए विभिन्न तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल का अनुभवजन्य रूप से अध्ययन करते हैं। मूल्यांकन किए गए मॉडल में कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क, दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक मेमोरी नेटवर्क, गेटेड आवर्तक इकाई और आवर्तक कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क शामिल हैं। हम विभिन्न एम्बेडिंग विधियों का भी पता लगाते हैं, जिसमें बेहतर प्रदर्शन के लिए शब्द एम्बेडिंग और भावना एम्बेडिंग शामिल हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система обнаружения гипернима для нашего участия в задаче 9 SemEval-2018, которая направлена на обнаружение лучших (набора) гипернимов-кандидатов для входных концепций или сущностей, учитывая пространство поиска предопределенного словаря. Мы вводим архитектуру нейронной сети для рассматриваемой задачи и эмпирически изучаем различные модели нейронной сети для построения представлений в латентном пространстве для слов и фраз. Оцениваемые модели включают сверточную нейронную сеть, сеть длительной кратковременной памяти, вентилируемый рекуррентный блок и рекурентную сверточную нейронную сеть. Мы также изучаем различные методы встраивания, включая встраивание слов и встраивание смысла для лучшей производительности.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chóras fionnachtana hipearnaim dár rannpháirtíocht i dTasc 9 SemEval-2018, a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige na hipearnainmneacha is fearr (tacar) is fearr a aimsiú le haghaidh coincheapa nó eintitis ionchuir, i bhfianaise spás cuardaigh stór focal réamhshainithe. Tugaimid ailtireacht líonra néarach isteach don tasc atá i gceist agus déanaimid staidéar eimpíreach ar mhúnlaí néarlíonra éagsúla chun na huiríll a thógáil i spás folaigh d'fhocail agus frásaí. Áirítear leis na samhlacha a ndearnadh meastóireacht orthu líonra néarúil comhraonta, líonra cuimhne gearrthéarmach, aonad athfhillteach gatáilte agus líonra néarach comhrthach athfhillteach. Déanaimid iniúchadh freisin ar mhodhanna éagsúla leabaithe, lena n-áirítear leabú focal agus leabú ciall le haghaidh feidhmíochta níos fearr.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει ένα σύστημα ανίχνευσης υπερνύμων για τη συμμετοχή μας στην εργασία το οποίο στοχεύει στην ανακάλυψη των καλύτερων (συνόλων) υποψήφιων υπερνύμων για έννοιες εισαγωγής ή οντότητες, δεδομένης του χώρου αναζήτησης ενός προκαθορισμένου λεξιλογίου. Εισάγουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικού δικτύου για το συγκεκριμένο έργο και μελετάμε εμπειρικά διάφορα μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων για να χτίσουμε τις αναπαραστάσεις σε λανθάνοντα χώρο για λέξεις και φράσεις. Τα αξιολογημένα μοντέλα περιλαμβάνουν το σύνθετο νευρωνικό δίκτυο, το μακροπρόθεσμο δίκτυο μνήμης, την περιφραγμένη επαναλαμβανόμενη μονάδα και το επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο. Εξετάζουμε επίσης διαφορετικές μεθόδους ενσωμάτωσης, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων και της ενσωμάτωσης αισθήσεων για καλύτερη απόδοση.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány a SemEval-2018 Task 9-ben való részvételünkhöz szükséges hypernymek felfedezésére irányuló rendszert ismertet, amelynek célja, hogy felfedezze a bemeneti koncepciók vagy entitások legjobb jelöltjeinek (halmazát), tekintettel egy előre meghatározott szókincs keresési területére. Bevezetünk egy ideghálózati architektúrát az érintett feladathoz, és empirikusan tanulmányozzuk a különböző ideghálózati modelleket, hogy felépítsük a szavak és kifejezések látens térben való reprezentációit. Az értékelt modellek közé tartoznak a konvuluációs neurális hálózat, a hosszú-rövid távú memória hálózat, a kapott visszatérő egység és a visszatérő konvuluációs neurális hálózat. A jobb teljesítmény érdekében különböző beágyazási módszereket is feltárunk, beleértve a szóbeágyazást és az érzékbágyazást.', 'ka': 'ეს დომენტი აღწერს ჰიპერნიმის აღმოჩენება სისტემის ჩვენი დავალდებისთვის SemEval-2018 დავალდებისთვის 9 დავალებში, რომელიც მიზეზიან გააღმოჩენოთ უკეთესი კანდენტის ჰიპერნიმის საუკეთესი (კონდენტის) კონტე ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტიქტიკური მოდელების შესახებ, რომელიც შესახებ სიტყვებისთვის და ფრაზებისთვის განსხვავებული ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელების მოდულებული მოდელების შესახებ კონგულუციონალური ნეიროლური ქსელი, ძირითადი მეხსიერების ქსელი, შესახებ რეკურენტი ერთეული და რეკურენტი კონგულუციონა ჩვენ ასევე განსხვავებული სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვ', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma mūsų dalyvavimo SemEval-2018 9 užduotyje hipernimų atradimo sistema, kuria siekiama nustatyti geriausius (rinkinį) kandidatų hipernimus įvedimo koncepcijoms ar subjektams, atsižvelgiant į iš anksto apibrėžto žodyno paieškos erdvę. Įdiegiame atitinkamos užduoties neuralinio tinklo architektūrą ir empiriniu būdu tiriame įvairius neuralinio tinklo modelius, kad pastatytume atspindimus slaptoje erdvėje žodžiams ir frazėms. Vertinti modeliai apima konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą, ilgalaikį trumpalaikį atminties tinklą, vartus pasikartojantį vienetą ir pasikartojantį konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą. Taip pat tiriame skirtingus įtraukimo metodus, įskaitant žodžių įtraukimą ir jausmą įtraukimą siekiant geresnių rezultatų.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive un sistema di scoperta di ipernimi per la nostra partecipazione al SemEval-2018 Task 9, che mira a scoprire i migliori (set di) ipernimi candidati per concetti o entità di input, dato lo spazio di ricerca di un vocabolario predefinito. Introduciamo un'architettura di rete neurale per il compito interessato e studiamo empiricamente vari modelli di rete neurale per costruire le rappresentazioni nello spazio latente di parole e frasi. I modelli valutati includono rete neurale convoluzionale, rete di memoria a lungo-breve termine, unità recidivante gated e rete neurale convoluzionale ricorrente. Esploriamo anche diversi metodi di embedding, tra cui l'embedding di parole e il sense embedding per migliorare le prestazioni.", 'mk': 'Овој весник опишува хипернимски систем за откривање за нашето учество во SemEval-2018 задачата 9, која има за цел откривање на најдобрите (сет) кандидатски хиперними за влезни концепти или ентитети, со оглед на просторот за пребарување на преддефиниран речник. Ние воведуваме нервна мрежа архитектура за загрижената задача и емпирички студираме различни нервни мрежни модели за да ги изградиме претставувањата во лантен простор за зборови и фрази. Оценетите модели вклучуваат конволуционална невролна мрежа, долгорочна мемориска мрежа, вратена рецидентна единица и рецидентна конволуционална невролна мрежа. Исто така истражуваме различни методи на вградување, вклучувајќи го и вградувањето на зборовите и чувството за подобра изведба.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің SemEval-2018 9 тапсырмасында қатысу үшін гипернимді табу жүйесін таңдайды. Бұл келтірілген сөздерді алдында анықталған іздеу орынды табу үшін ең жақсы (келтірілген) кандидаттардың гипернимдерін табуға мақсатты. Біз тапсырманың невралдық желінің архитектурасын таңдап, империялық түрлі невралдық желінің моделдерін зерттеп, сөздер мен фразтар үшін кейінгі кеңістіктерді құруға арналған. Бағалатын үлгілер көлемді неврал желі, ұзын- қысқа жады желі, қайталанатын бірлігі мен қайталанатын неврал желі болады. Мұндай-ақ біз басқа ендіру әдістерін зерттеп, сөздерді ендіру мен сезімізді жақсы істеу үшін ендіру.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമം കണ്ടെത്താനുള്ള സിസ്റ്റമിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിക്കുവേണ്ടി ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടാര്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. വാക്കുകളും വാക മൂല്യം ചെയ്യപ്പെടുത്തിയ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞ നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d ശൃംഖലം, നീണ്ട കാലം മെമ്മറി ശൃംഖലം, ആവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക് നമ്മളും വ്യത്യസ്ത മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും നല്ല പ്രകടനത്തിനുള്ള വി', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem penemuan hipernim untuk ketertarikan kami dalam SemEval-2018 Task 9, yang bertujuan untuk penemuan hipernim calon terbaik (set) untuk konsep atau entiti input, diberikan ruang gelintar vocabulari terdefinisikan. Kami memperkenalkan arkitektur rangkaian saraf untuk tugas yang bimbang dan secara empirik mempelajari pelbagai model rangkaian saraf untuk membina perwakilan dalam ruang tersembunyi untuk perkataan dan frasa. Model yang diteliti termasuk rangkaian saraf konvolusi, rangkaian memori jangka pendek panjang, unit berulang gerbang dan rangkaian saraf konvolusi berulang. Kami juga mengeksplorasi kaedah penyembedding berbeza, termasuk penyembedding perkataan dan rasa penyembedding untuk prestasi yang lebih baik.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system wykrywania hipernimów dla naszego udziału w zadaniu SemEval-2018 9, którego celem jest odkrycie najlepszych (zbiorów) hipernimów kandydatów dla koncepcji wejściowych lub podmiotów, biorąc pod uwagę przestrzeń wyszukiwania wstępnie zdefiniowanego słownictwa. Wprowadzamy architekturę sieci neuronowej dla danego zadania i badamy empirycznie różne modele sieci neuronowych, aby budować reprezentacje w utajonej przestrzeni słów i zwrotów. Oceniane modele obejmują konwolucyjną sieć neuronową, długoterminową sieć pamięci, gated recovering unit i recovering conwolucyjną sieć neuronową. Badamy również różne metody osadzania, w tym osadzanie słów i osadzanie sense dla lepszej wydajności.', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi sistema ta’ skoperta ta’ iperinimi għall-parteċipazzjoni tagħna fil-Kompitu 9 SemEval-2018, li għandha l-għan li tiskopri l-a ħjar (sett ta’ ) iperinimi kandidati għal kunċetti jew entitajiet ta’ input, minħabba l-ispazju ta’ tiftix ta’ vokabulari ddefinit minn qabel. Aħna nintroduċu arkitettura tan-netwerk newrali għall-kompitu kkonċernat u nistudjaw empirikament mudelli differenti tan-netwerk newrali biex nibnu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet fl-ispazju moħbi għall-kliem u l-frażijiet. Il-mudelli evalwati jinkludu netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali, netwerk tal-memorja fuq medda twila ta’ żmien qasira, unit à rikorrenti gated u netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali rikorrenti. Aħna nistudjaw ukoll metodi differenti ta' inkorporazzjoni, inklużi inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem u inkorporazzjoni tas-sens għal prestazzjoni aħjar.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2018 Task 9-д оролцохын тулд гиперним нээлтийн системийг тайлбарладаг. Энэ нь урьд тодорхойлогдсон үгийг олох хамгийн сайн (нээлтийн) удирдагчийн гиперним гэдэг. Бид үүний тухай ажил дээр мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурыг танилцуулж, сонирхолтой зүйл дээр олон мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загваруудыг судалж, үг болон өгүүлбэр дээр илэрхийллийг бий болгох болно. Шалгагдсан загварууд нь холбоотой мэдрэлийн сүлжээ, урт хугацааны санамжийн сүлжээ, холбоотой дахин дахин нэгж болон дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээ юм. Мөн бид өөр өөр нэгтгэх аргыг судалж, илүү сайн үйл ажиллагаанд оролцох үг болон мэдрэмжтэй байдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver eit hypernymoppdagingssystem for vårt deltakar i semiEval-2018 oppgåva 9, som mål å oppdaga dei beste (set av) kandidathypernymane for inndata- konseptar eller entiteter, gjeven søkjemoden til eit fordefinert ordbok. Vi introduserer ein neuralnettverksarkitektur for den hende oppgåva og empirisk studerer ulike neuralnettverksmodeller for å bygge representasjonane i latere plass for ord og fraser. Den evaluerte modelane inneheld konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk, langsiktig minnetverk, gated recurrent unit og rekursive konvolusjonell neuralnettverk. Vi undersøker også ulike innbyggingsmetodar, inkludert ordinnbygging og følelsesinnbygging for betre utvikling.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa ku qoran nidaam baabuur ah oo aan ka qayb galno shuqulka 9 ee SemEval-2018, kaas oo looga jeedaa inuu ogaado qofka ugu wanaagsan (saxda) oo ka mid ah dhanka kirada ama waxyaabaha la qoray, iyadoo lagu raadiyo booska codsiga hore lagu qoray. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa dhismaha shabakadda neurada ee shuqulka la xiriira, si aan u barano tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo shabakadda neurada ah si aan u dhisno noocyada ugu dambeeya ee hadalka iyo hadallada. Tusaalada lagu qiimeeyo waxaa ka mid ah shabakadda neurada, shabakadda xasuusta waqtiga dheer, qeybta soo deganaanshaha iyo shabakadda neurada ee soo socda. Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraannaa qaabooyin kala duduwan oo ku habboon, kuwaas oo ah hadal ku habboon iyo fahmo ku habboon sameynta sameynta wanaagsan.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie un sistem de descoperire a hipernimelor pentru participarea noastră la SemEval-2018 Task 9, care își propune să descopere cele mai bune hipernime candidate pentru concepte sau entități de intrare, având în vedere spațiul de căutare al unui vocabular predefinit. Introducem o arhitectură de rețea neurală pentru sarcina în cauză și studiem empiric diferite modele de rețea neurală pentru a construi reprezentări în spațiul latent pentru cuvinte și fraze. Modelele evaluate includ rețeaua neuronală convoluțională, rețeaua de memorie pe termen lung-scurt, unitatea recurentă închisă și rețeaua neuronală convoluțională recurentă. De asemenea, explorăm diferite metode de încorporare, inclusiv încorporarea cuvintelor și încorporarea simțurilor pentru o performanță mai bună.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem otkrivanja hipernima za naše sudjelovanje u zadatku 9. semiEval-2018, koji je cilj otkrivanja najboljih (set a) hipernima kandidata za koncept ulaska ili entitate, s obzirom na potragu prostora preddefiniranog rečenika. Predstavljamo arhitekturu neuralne mreže za zabrinuto zadatke i empirički proučavamo različite modele neuralne mreže kako bi izgradili predstave u poslednjem prostoru za reči i fraze. Procjenjivani modeli uključuju konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu, dugoročnu mrežu pamćenja, povratnu jedinicu i povratnu konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu. Takoðe istražujemo razlièite metode ukljuèujuæi ukljuèujuæi ukljuèujuæi reèi ukljuèujuæi i oseæaj ukljuèujuæi se za bolju izvedbu.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver ett system för upptäckt av hypernymer för vårt deltagande i SemEval-2018 Task 9, som syftar till att upptäcka de bästa (uppsättningen) kandidater hypernymer för inmatningskoncept eller entiteter, med tanke på sökutrymmet i ett fördefinierat ordförråd. Vi introducerar en neural nätverksarkitektur för den aktuella uppgiften och empiriskt studerar olika neurala nätverksmodeller för att bygga representationer i latent utrymme för ord och fraser. De utvärderade modellerna inkluderar konvulutionellt neuralt nätverk, kortsiktigt minnesnätverk, gated recurent unit och återkommande konvulutionellt neuralt nätverk. Vi undersöker också olika inbäddningsmetoder, inklusive ord inbäddning och sense inbäddning för bättre prestanda.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ හායිපර්නිම් හොයාගන්න පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා අපේ සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩ 9 වැඩේ සඳහා අභියෝජනයේ හොඳම (සෙට්) අභියෝජනය හෝ අභියෝජනය සඳහා හ අපි සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සඳහා න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා වචන සහ වචන සඳහා වෙනස් න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලය මොඩේල් අධ විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන මොඩේල් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලය, ලොකු කාලකාලක මතක ජාලය, ප්\u200dරතිකාලක ජාලය, ප අපි වගේම වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, වචන සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සහ හ හොඳ ප්\u200dරභාවිත විද', 'ur': 'This paper describes a hypernym discovery system for our participation in the SemEval-2018 Task 9, which aims to discover the best (set of) candidate hypernyms for input concepts or entities, given the search space of a pre-defined vocabulary. ہم نے ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک معماری معماری کو معلوم کرتا ہے کہ کلمات اور کلمات کے لئے مختلف نئورل نیٹ ورک مدلکوں کی تعلیم کریں۔ مطالعہ کئے ہوئے موڈلز کانلوریشن نیورل نیٹورک، لنگ- لنگ- لنگ مہربانی نیٹورک، گٹ ریٹرینٹ یونیٹ اور دوبارہ ریٹرینٹ کونلوریشن نیورل نیٹورک میں شامل ہیں. ہم نے بھی مختلف ایمبڈینگ طریقے کا تحقیق کرتا ہے، یہاں تک کہ کلمات ابڈینگ اور حس کے ساتھ اچھی عملکرد کے لئے ابڈینگ کرتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval-2018 பணி 9-ல் எங்கள் பகிர்ந்திருப்பத்திற்கான ஹைப்பரிம் கண்டுபிடிப்பு அமைப்பை விளக்குகிறது, அது சிறந்த த தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட சொல்வளத்தின் தேடுதல் இடத நாம் ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கத்தை அறிவிக்கிறோம் தேவைப்படும் பணிக்கு மற்றும் வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் சொற்றொடர்களுக்கான பிரதி மதிப்பிடப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளில் சாதாரண புதிய பிணையத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல், நீண்ட நினைவகம் வலைப்பின்னல், திரும்ப நிகழ்வு அலகு மற்றும்  நாம் வேறு வித்தியாசமான உள்ளடக்க முறைகளையும் தேடுகிறோம், சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டிற்கு உள்ளிடும் சொல்லும', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 Vazifa 9 Ishga шерик бўлишимизга hypernym discovery tizimini anglatadi. Bu muammolarning oldin aniqlangan soʻzni qidirish uchun eng yaxshi (o'xshash) vazifa hisoblarini ko'rsatish mumkin. Biz muammolar vazifasi uchun neyrol tarmoq mualliflarini ishlatamiz va hayrat qilamiz va yangi so'z va so'zlar uchun har xil tarmoq modellarini o'rganamiz. Koʻrsatilgan modellarda umumiy neyrol tarmoq, uzoq xotira tarmoq, davom etilgan birlik va davom etilgan tarmoq tarmoq. Bu yerda biz yaxshi bajarish uchun o'zgarishga kiritilgan so'zlarni ko'rib chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả một hệ thống phát hiện siêu cuồng phong cho sự tham gia của chúng ta trong nhiệm vụ SemEvol-208 9, nhằm mục đích tìm ra siêu âm ứng cử viên tốt nhất cho các khái niệm nhập hoặc thực thể nhập, dựa vào khoảng tìm kiếm của một từ đã xác định. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một cấu trúc mạng thần kinh cho công việc liên quan và nghiên cứu nhiều mô hình mạng thần kinh khác nhau để xây dựng các biểu tượng trong vùng tiềm ẩn cho các từ và cụm từ. Các mô hình đánh giá bao gồm mạng thần kinh rối loạn, mạng bộ nhớ ngắn hạn, đơn vị lưu lại và mạng lưới thần kinh liên kết thường xuyên. Chúng tôi cũng tìm hiểu các phương pháp lắp ghép khác nhau, bao gồm việc ghép từ và nhận thức để có hiệu quả tốt hơn.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver et hypernymopdagelsessystem til vores deltagelse i SemEval-2018 Task 9, som har til formål at opdage de bedste (sæt af) kandidathypernymmer til input koncepter eller enheder, i betragtning af søgerummet i et foruddefineret ordforråd. Vi introducerer en neural netværksarkitektur til den pågældende opgave og empirisk studerer forskellige neurale netværksmodeller for at opbygge repræsentationer i latent rum for ord og sætninger. De evaluerede modeller omfatter konvulutivt neuralt netværk, langtidshukommelsesnetværk, gated recurent enhed og tilbagevendende konvulutivt neuralt netværk. Vi undersøger også forskellige indlejringsmetoder, herunder ordindlejring og sanse indlejring for bedre ydeevne.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav otkrića hipernima za naše sudjelovanje u zadatku 9. polovine Eval-2018, koji je cilj otkriti najbolji (skup) hipernima kandidata za ulazne koncepte ili entitate, s obzirom na potragu prostora predodređenog rečenika. Predstavljamo arhitekturu neuralne mreže za odgovoran zadatak i empirički proučavamo različite modele neuralne mreže kako bi izgradili predstave u zadnjem prostoru za riječi i fraze. Procjenjeni modeli uključuju konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu, dugoročnu mrežu pamćenja, povratnu jedinicu i povratnu konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu. Također istražujemo različite metode ugrađenja, uključujući ugrađenje riječi i osjećaj ugrađenja za bolju učinku.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt ein Hypernym-Discovery-System für unsere Teilnahme an der SemEval-2018 Task 9, das darauf abzielt, die besten (Satz) Kandidatenhypernyme für Eingabekonzepte oder Entitäten zu finden, angesichts des Suchraums eines vordefinierten Vokabulars. Wir führen eine neuronale Netzwerkarchitektur für die betreffende Aufgabe ein und untersuchen empirisch verschiedene neuronale Netzwerkmodelle, um die Repräsentationen im latenten Raum für Wörter und Phrasen aufzubauen. Die ausgewerteten Modelle umfassen convolutionales neuronales Netzwerk, Langzeit-Kurzzeitgedächtnisnetzwerk, gated recidivierende Einheit und recidivierendes neuronales Netzwerk. Wir untersuchen auch verschiedene Einbettungsmethoden, einschließlich Wort-Einbettung und Sense-Einbettung für eine bessere Leistung.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва система за откриване на хиперними за нашето участие в задача 9, която има за цел да открие най-добрия (набор от) кандидат-хиперними за входни понятия или образувания, предвид пространството за търсене на предварително определен речник. Въвеждаме архитектура на невронната мрежа за съответната задача и емпирично изучаваме различни модели на невронна мрежа за изграждане на изображения в латентно пространство за думи и фрази. Оценените модели включват конволюционна невронна мрежа, дългосрочна краткосрочна памет мрежа, затворена рецидивираща единица и рецидивираща конволюционна невронна мрежа. Също така изследваме различни методи за вграждане, включително вграждане на думи и вграждане на усещания за по-добра производителност.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft een hyperniem discovery systeem voor onze deelname aan de SemEval-2018 Task 9, dat gericht is op het ontdekken van de beste (set) kandidaat hyperniemen voor invoerconcepten of entiteiten, gezien de zoekruimte van een vooraf gedefinieerde woordenschat. We introduceren een neurale netwerkarchitectuur voor de betreffende taak en bestuderen empirisch verschillende neurale netwerkmodellen om de representaties in latente ruimte voor woorden en zinnen te bouwen. De geëvalueerde modellen omvatten convolutional neural network, long-short term memory network, gated recurrenting unit en recurrenting convolutional neural network. We onderzoeken ook verschillende embedding methoden, waaronder woord embedding en sense embedding voor betere prestaties.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa uvumbuzi wa umeme wa kushiriki katika kazi 9 ya SemEval-2018, ambalo linakusudia kugundua vizuri vya wagombea (seti bora) kwa dhana au vyombo vya habari, kufuatia kutafuta nafasi ya neno lililoelezwa kabla. Tunawasilisha ujenzi wa mtandao wa kidini kwa kazi zinazohusiana na kutafiti kwa makini miundo mbalimbali ya mtandao wa neurali ili kujenga uwakilishi katika nafasi ya hivi karibuni kwa maneno na maneno. Mradi uliotambuliwa ni pamoja na mtandao wa utaratibu wa neura, Mtandao wa kumbukumbu wa muda mrefu, kituo kinachoendelea na mtandao wa kikatili unaoendelea. Pia tunatafuta mbinu tofauti za kuingia, ikiwa ni pamoja na maneno yanayoingia na hisia zinazoingia kwa ajili ya utendaji mzuri.', 'id': 'This paper describes a hypernym discovery system for our participation in the SemEval-2018 Task 9, which aims to discover the best (set of) candidate hypernyms for input concepts or entities, given the search space of a pre-defined vocabulary.  Kami memperkenalkan arsitektur jaringan saraf untuk tugas yang tertarik dan secara empirik mempelajari berbagai model jaringan saraf untuk membangun representation dalam ruang latent untuk kata-kata dan frasa. Model yang diteliti termasuk jaringan saraf konvolusi, jaringan memori jangka pendek panjang, unit recurrent gerbang dan jaringan saraf konvolusi recurrent. Kami juga mengeksplorasi metode penyembedding yang berbeda, termasuk penyembedding kata dan rasa penyembedding untuk prestasi yang lebih baik.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم کشف هیپرنیم برای مشارکت ما در کار ۹ نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ توصیف می\u200cکند، که هدف دارد بهترین (مجموعه) هیپرنیم کاندیداتی برای مفهوم ورودی یا اجتماعات را کشف کند، با توجه به جستجوی فضای یک کلمه پیش تعریف شده است. ما یک معماری شبکه عصبی را برای کار مشغول معرفی می کنیم و به طور عمومی مدل شبکه عصبی مختلف را مطالعه می کنیم تا معرفیات در فضای اخیر برای کلمات و جمله ساخته شود. مدل\u200cهای ارزیابی شامل شبکه\u200cهای عصبی همگانی، شبکه حافظه\u200cهای طولانی مدت طولانی، واحد تکرار و شبکه عصبی تکرار شده است. ما همچنین روش\u200cهای پیدا کردن متفاوتی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، شامل کلمات پیدا کردن و حس پیدا کردن برای عملکرد بهتر.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18 퀘스트 9에 참여하는 데 사용되는 슈퍼 명칭 발견 시스템을 묘사한다. 이 시스템은 개념이나 실체를 입력하는 가장 좋은 후보 슈퍼 명칭을 발견하고 미리 정의된 어휘의 검색 공간을 정하는 데 목적을 둔다.우리는 관련 임무를 위해 일종의 신경 네트워크 구조를 도입하고 각종 신경 네트워크 모델을 실증 연구하여 단어와 단어가 잠재적인 공간에서의 표현을 구축하도록 했다.평가 모델은 권적신경망, 장단기기억망, 선통귀속단원과 권적신경망을 포함한다.우리는 단어 삽입과 의미 삽입을 포함한 다양한 삽입 방법을 모색하여 더욱 좋은 성능을 얻었다.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull përshkruan një sistem zbulimi hipernim për pjesëmarrjen tonë në SemEval-2018 Task 9, i cili synon të zbulojë hipernimet më të mira (set) kandidate për konceptet apo njësitë e hyrjes, duke marrë parasysh hapësirën e kërkimit të një fjalor të përcaktuar para. Ne prezantojmë një arkitekturë rrjeti neural për detyrën e shqetësuar dhe studiojmë në mënyrë empirike modele të ndryshme rrjeti neural për të ndërtuar përfaqësimet në hapësirë të fshehtë për fjalë dhe fraza. Modelet e vlerësuara përfshijnë rrjetin nervor konvolutiv, rrjetin e kujtesës afat-shkurtër, njësinë e përsëritur të portës dhe rrjetin nervor konvolutiv të përsëritur. Ne gjithashtu eksplorojmë metoda të ndryshme përfshirjeje, duke përfshirë përfshirjen e fjalëve dhe përfshirjen e ndjeve për përfshirje më të mirë.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval Biz alada täzelikleriň üçin näyral şebeke arhitektegi tapýarys we eýperiýaly näyral şebeke modellerini soňky sözler we sözler üçin suratlaryny gurmak üçin öwrenipdir. Taýýarlanan modeller karmaşık näyral şebekesi, uzun zamanly ýagtylyk netijesi, gatlanan ýerleşme birimi we ýerleşme tertiblenen näyral şebekesi ekleýär Biz hem farklı birleşme yöntemleri keşfedip gözlemek üçin sözleri girmek we duýgulamak üçin göz önüne girmek üçin gözlenýäris.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը նկարագրում է հիպերնիմների հայտնագործման համակարգը մեր մասնակցության համար ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի 9-ի հանձնարարության մեջ, որը նպատակով է հայտնաբերել ամենալավ (շարք) թեկնածուների հիպերնիմներ մուտքագրման գաղափարների կամ էլեկտների համար, հաշվի առնելով նախկինում We introduce a neural network architecture for the concerned task and empirically study various neural network models to build the representations in latent space for words and phrases.  Արժեցված մոդելները ներառում են կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանց, երկարաժամկետ հիշողության ցանց, դարանի կրկնվող միավոր և կրկնվող կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանց: Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր ներգրավման մեթոդներ, ներառյալ բառերի ներգրավման և զգացմունքների ներգրավման ավելի լավ ներկայացման համար:', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf 'n hipernim ontdekking stelsel vir ons gedeelte in die SemEval-2018 taak 9, wat doel om die beste (stel van) kandidatiehipernime te ontdek vir invoer konsepte of entiteite, gegee die soekruimte van 'n voor-gedefinieerde woordeboek. Ons introduseer 'n neuralnetwerk arkitektuur vir die betrokke taak en empiriese studieer verskillende neuralnetwerk modele om die voorstellings in latente ruimte te bou vir woorde en frase. Die evalueerde modele insluit konvolusielike neuralnetwerk, lang- kort geheue netwerk, herhaalde rekursiewenheid en herhaalde konvolusielike neuralnetwerk. Ons ondersoek ook verskillende inbetering metodes, insluitend woord inbetering en sin inbetering vir beter prestasie.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের অংশগ্রহণের জন্য হাইপারেনিম আবিষ্কার ব্যবস্থা বর্ণনা করেছে, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে ইনপুট ধারণা বা বস্তুর জন্য সেরা (সেটের সেরা ) প্রার্থীর হা সম্পর্কিত কাজের জন্য আমরা নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি এবং সাম্প্রতিক জায়গায় প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল মূল্যায়ন করা মডেলের মধ্যে রয়েছে সংকল্প নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক, দীর্ঘ মেমোমেরি নেটওয়ার্ক, পুনরায় প্রতিযোগিতা ইউনিট এবং পুনরায় সং আমরা বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি অনুসন্ধান করি, যার মধ্যে শব্দ বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভ', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem otkrića hipernima za naše sudjelovanje u zadatku 9. polovine Evala-2018, koji je cilj otkrivanja najboljih (seta) hipernima kandidata za ulazne koncepte ili entitate, s obzirom na potragu prostora preddefiniranog rečenika. Predstavljamo arhitekturu neuralne mreže za zabrinuto zadatke i empirički proučavamo različite modele neuralne mreže kako bi izgradili predstave u poslednjem prostoru za riječi i fraze. Procjenjivani modeli uključuju konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu, dugoročnu mrežu pamćenja, povratnu jedinicu i povratnu konvolucionnu neuralnu mrežu. Također istražujemo različite metode uključujući ugrađenje riječi i osjećaj ugrađenja za bolju izvedbu.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የሳምEval-2018 ስራ 9 ተግባር ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን (የመከላከል) አፍሪሜን ለማግኘት የሚያስፈልገውን የፊርኒም አፍሪም ማግኘት ስርዓት አስቀድሞ የተመረጠውን ቃላት ወይም አካላትን ለመፈለግ የሚችሉትን አፍሪሜን ለማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ በአጠቃላይ ቃላት እና ቃላት እና ቃላት እና ቃላትን ለመሥራት የናውሬል መረብ ሞዴላዎችን እናስተምር ዘንድ የኔትራዊ መረብ የመረብ መሠረት ማነሻ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተመለከተው ሞዴላዎች በሙሉ የኔሩኤል መረብ፣ የረጅም የረጅም የቁመት ማስታወሻ መረብ፣ የመደጋገሚያ የክፍል ክፍል እና የተደጋገመ የደዌብ መረብ ይኖራል፡፡ እናም ለጥሩ ስርዓት የተለየ ቃላት እና ማስታወቂያውን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'az': "Bu kağıt bizim SemEval-2018 Task 9'da iştirağımız üçün hipernim keşf sistemini təsdiqləyir. Bu, əvvəlcə belə təsdiqlənmiş sözlərin arama alanına görə ən yaxşısını keşf etmək niyyətindədir. Biz məxluqat üçün nöral a ğ arhitektarını təşkil edirik və sözlər və sözlər üçün müxtəlif nöral ağ modellerini təhsil edirik. Qıymetli modellər konvolucional nöral şəbəkəsi, uzun-qısa zamanlı yaddaş şəbəkəsi, qaytarılmış bir hissəsi və tekrarlı konvolucional nöral şəbəkəsi içərilidir. Biz də müxtəlif inbing metodlarını keşif edirik, daha yaxşı performans üçün sözləri inbinmə və hissləri də dahil edirik.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém zjišťování hypernymů pro naši účast na SemEval-2018 Task 9, jehož cílem je objevit nejlepší (sadu) kandidátských hypernymů pro vstupní koncepce nebo entity, vzhledem k vyhledávacímu prostoru předem definované slovní zásoby. Představujeme architekturu neuronové sítě pro daný úkol a empiricky studujeme různé modely neuronových sítí pro sestavení reprezentací v latentním prostoru pro slova a fráze. Hodnocené modely zahrnují konvoluční neuronovou síť, síť dlouhodobé krátkodobé paměti, gated recidivující jednotku a recidivující konvoluční neuronovou síť. Také zkoumáme různé metody vložení, včetně vložení slov a smyslového vložení pro lepší výkon.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse hüpernüümide avastamise süsteemi meie osalemiseks SemEval-2018 ülesandes 9, mille eesmärk on leida parimad kandidaadi hüpernüümid sisendkontseptsioonide või olemite jaoks, arvestades eelnevalt määratletud sõnavara otsinguruumi. Tutvustame asjaomase ülesande jaoks neurovõrgu arhitektuuri ning uurime empiiriliselt erinevaid neurovõrgumudeleid, et luua sõnade ja fraaside esindusi latentses ruumis. Hinnatud mudelite hulka kuuluvad konvolutsiooniline närvivõrk, pikaajaline mäluvõrk, suletud korduv üksus ja korduv konvolutsiooniline närvivõrk. Samuti uurime erinevaid manustamismeetodeid, sealhulgas sõna manustamist ja sense manustamist parema jõudluse saavutamiseks.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu un sistema de descobriment d'hipernim per a la nostra participació a la tasca 9 SemEval-2018, que busca descobrir els millors hipernims candidats per conceptes o entitats d'entrada, dada l'espai de cerca d'un vocabulari predefinit. Introduïm una arquitectura de xarxa neural per a la tasca preocupada i estudiem empíricament diversos models de xarxa neural per construir les representacions en espai latent per paraules i frases. Els models evaluats inclouen la xarxa neural convolutiva, la xarxa de memòria a curt termini, la unitat recurrent portada i la xarxa neural convolutiva recurrent. També explorem diferents mètodes d'incorporació, incloent l'incorporació de paraules i el sentit d'incorporació per a millor rendiment.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan hypernyymien etsintäjärjestelmä SemEval-2018 tehtävään 9 osallistumiselle, jonka tavoitteena on löytää parhaat (joukko) ehdokkaiden hypernyymit syöttökäsitteille tai entiteeteille, kun otetaan huomioon ennalta määritellyn sanaston hakutila. Esittelemme tehtävään neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurin ja tutkimme empiirisesti erilaisia neuroverkkomalleja, joiden avulla voimme rakentaa latenttiin tilaan sanoja ja lauseita. Arvioituja malleja ovat konvolutionaalinen neuroverkko, pitkän aikavälin muistiverkko, suljettu toistuva yksikkö ja toistuva konvolutionaalinen neuroverkko. Tutkimme myös erilaisia upotusmenetelmiä, kuten sanan upottamista ja sense upottamista paremman suorituskyvyn saavuttamiseksi.', 'jv': 'This paper describs a theorem detection System for us partition in the semiinval-2020 task 9, whose goal is to find the right (set of) kandidate Awak dhéwé nggawe Arkturalan tambah alat sing nggawe nggawe gerakan lan ijol-ijolan model alat sing nyimpen kanggo nggawe representasi tarjamahan kanggo kelangan kelangan kanggo awak dhéwé lan ujol Kernel embedding', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר מערכת גילוי היפרנימים לשתתפותנו במשימה 9 SemEval-2018, המטרה לגלות את היפרנימים המועמדים הטובים ביותר (set of) למחשבות או יחידות כניסה, בהתחשב במרחב חיפוש של מילון מוגדר מראש. אנחנו מציגים ארכיטקטורה רשת עצבית למשימה המודאגת וללמד באמפריה מודלים רשת עצבית שונים הדוגמנים המערכים כוללים רשת עצבית משתנה, רשת זיכרון לטווח ארוך וקצר, יחידה משוחררת ושוחררת עצבית משתנה משתנה. אנחנו גם חוקרים שיטות פיתוח שונות, כולל פיתוח מילים וחוש פיתוח עבור ביצועים טובים יותר.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem odkrivanja hipernimov za naše sodelovanje v nalogi 9 SemEval-2018, katerega cilj je odkriti najboljše (niz) kandidatnih hipernimov za vhodne koncepte ali entitete glede na iskalni prostor vnaprej določenega besedišča. Za zadevno nalogo predstavljamo arhitekturo nevronskega omrežja in empirično preučujemo različne modele nevronskega omrežja za gradnjo reprezentacij v latentnem prostoru za besede in fraze. Ocenjeni modeli vključujejo konvolucijsko nevronsko omrežje, dolgoročno pomnilniško omrežje, zaprto ponavljajočo enoto in ponavljajočo konvolucijsko nevronsko omrežje. Raziskujemo tudi različne metode vdelave, vključno z vdelavo besed in vdelavo smisla za boljšo učinkovitost.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗi wani na'urar ganin surori na Semeval-2018, wanda ya yi nufin ya gane mafiya kyakkyawan (na daidaita) kandidani na hotumarni wa zato ko abubuwa da aka nuna filin maganar ta gaba ɗaya. Tuna fara wani matsayin tarayyan na ƙarura wa aikin da ke cikin sha'ani da kuma muna karanta, misãlai masu cikin taruwar neural dõmin ya gina mabakin cikin filinaiki a yanzu zuwa maganar da magana. Yi da shirin da aka evaluce yana da shirin neural na ɗabi'a, jerin memory mai tsawo, yana da shirin rabo da aka baka yana da wato na takardar ta'urar. Kayya, Munã sami hanyoyin daban-dabam, kamar maganar ta shiga da sanyi wanda ke cikin mafiya alhẽri.", 'bo': 'ཤོག ང་ཚོས་བློ་གཏད་དུས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་དྲ་བཟོ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། The evaluated models include convolutional neural network, long-short term memory network, gated recurrent unit and recurrent convolutional neural network. ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་ཞིག་ཀྱང་སྦྱར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ལ་བཙལ་ནས།'}
{'en': 'NLP_HZ at SemEval-2018 Task 9 : a Nearest Neighbor Approach', 'ar': 'NLP_HZ في SemEval-2018 المهمة 9: نهج الجار الأقرب', 'pt': 'NLP_HZ na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 9: uma abordagem do vizinho mais próximo', 'fr': 'NLP_HZ à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 9\xa0: une approche du plus proche voisin', 'es': 'NLP_HZ en SemEval-2018 Tarea 9: un enfoque de vecino más cercano', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のNLP_HZタスク9 ：最も近いアプローチ', 'ru': 'NLP_HZ на SemEval-2018 Задача 9: Подход ближайших соседей', 'zh': 'NLP_HZåœ¨SemEval-2018åŠ¡9:è¿‘é‚»ä¹‹æ³•', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 9 पर NLP_HZ: एक निकटतम पड़ोसी दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'NLP_HZ ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 9: Cur Chuige ar an gComharsan is Gaire', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'NLP_HZ στο έργο 9: μια προσέγγιση εγγύτερων γειτόνων', 'hu': 'NLP_HZ a SemEval-2018 9. feladaton: a legközelebbi szomszédos megközelítés', 'it': 'NLP_HZ al SemEval-2018 Task 9: un approccio più vicino', 'kk': 'NLP_HZ 30- 2018 тапсырмасында 9- тапсырма: ең жақын көңіл жағдайда', 'mk': 'NLP_HZ на SemEval-2018 задача 9: најблиски соседски пристап', 'lt': 'NLP_HZ at SemEval-2018 Task 9: a Nearest Neighbor Approach', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 9-ല്\u200d NLP_ HZ: അടുത്ത ഒരു അടുത്ത തെരുവില്\u200d', 'ms': 'NLP_HZ pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 9: pendekatan jiran terdekat', 'mt': 'NLP_HZ f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 9: Approċċ tal-Viċin l-eqreb', 'mn': 'NLP_HZ at SemEval-2018 Task 9: a Neast Neighbour Approach', 'pl': 'NLP_HZ w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 9: podejście do najbliższych sąsiadów', 'no': 'NLP_HZ ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 9: ein næraste nabotnærming', 'sr': 'NLP_HZ na semiEval-2018 Task 9: najbliži pristup susjedstva', 'ro': 'NLP_HZ la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 9: o abordare cea mai apropiată vecinătate', 'si': 'NLP', 'sv': 'NLP_HZ på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 9: Närmaste grannstrategi', 'ta': 'NLP_HZ at SemEval-2018 Task 9: a Nearest Neighbor Approach', 'so': 'Shaqa 9:', 'ur': 'NLP_HZ SemEval-2018 Task 9: ایک نزدیک گھر کے پاس', 'uz': 'SemEval-2018 vazifa 9: Yaqinda keladigan', 'vi': 'NLP HZ ở SemEvl-208 Task 9: A cận kề láng giềng gần nhất', 'bg': 'Задача 9: подход към най-близките съседи', 'nl': 'NLP_HZ bij SemEval-2018 Taak 9: een benadering van de dichtstbijzijnde buurman', 'da': 'NLP_HZ på SemEval-2018 Opgave 9: En nærmeste nabo tilgang', 'ko': 'NLP HZ가 SemEval-18 작업 9: 최근 인접', 'de': 'NLP_HZ bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 9: ein Ansatz für den nächsten Nachbarn', 'id': 'NLP_HZ di SemEval-2018 Tugas 9: pendekatan tetangga terdekat', 'sw': 'NLP_HZ katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 9: Karibu ya Karibu', 'fa': 'NLP_HZ در ماموریت شماره ۲۰۱۸: نزدیک\u200cترین همسایه\u200cها', 'tr': 'NLP_HZ at SemEval-2018 Task 9: a Nearest Neighbour Approach', 'af': 'NLP_HZ by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 9: √¢¬Ä¬ôn Naamste Neighbour Approach', 'sq': 'NLP_HZ në SemEval-2018 Task 9: a Nearest Neighbour Approach', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 9:', 'hr': 'NLP_HZ na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 9: najbliži pristup susjedstva', 'hy': 'ՆԼՊ_Hz-ը, 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի 9-ի հանձնարարում. ամենամոտ հարևանի մոտեցումը', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৯-এ এনএলপি_এইচজি: কাছাকাছি কাছাকাছি একটি কাছাকাছিক', 'bs': 'NLP_HZ na pola Evala-2018 Task 9: najbliži pristup susjedstva', 'ca': 'NLP_HZ a SemEval-2018 Task 9: a Nearest Neighbour Approach', 'cs': 'NLP_HZ na SemEval-2018 Úkol 9: přístup k nejbližším sousedům', 'et': 'NLP_HZ SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 9: lähima naabri lähenemisviis', 'fi': 'NLP_HZ SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 9: Lähinaapurin lähestymistapa', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 9: ən yaxın qonşuların yaxınlığı', 'jv': 'NLP', 'he': 'NLP_HZ ב SemEval-2018 משימה 9: גישה שכן קרובה ביותר', 'sk': 'NLP_HZ na SemEval-2018 naloga 9: najbližji sosedski pristop', 'ha': 'QNetworkAccessFileBackend', 'bo': 'NLP_HZ at SemEval-2018 Task 9: a Nearest Neighbor Approach'}
{'en': 'Hypernym discovery aims to discover the hypernym word sets given a hyponym word and proper corpus. This paper proposes a simple but effective method for the discovery of hypernym sets based on word embedding, which can be used to measure the contextual similarities between words. Given a test hyponym word, we get its hypernym lists by computing the similarities between the hyponym word and words in the training data, and fill the test word’s hypernym lists with the hypernym list in the training set of the nearest similarity distance to the test word. In SemEval 2018 task9, our results, achieve 1st on Spanish, 2nd on Italian, 6th on English in the metric of MAP.', 'ar': 'يهدف اكتشاف Hypernym إلى اكتشاف مجموعات الكلمات التشعبية المعطاة لكلمة hyponym ومجسم مناسب. تقترح هذه الورقة طريقة بسيطة ولكنها فعالة لاكتشاف مجموعات Hypernym بناءً على تضمين الكلمات ، والتي يمكن استخدامها لقياس أوجه التشابه السياقية بين الكلمات. بالنظر إلى كلمة اختبار hyponym ، نحصل على قوائم Hypernym الخاصة بها عن طريق حساب أوجه التشابه بين كلمة hyponym والكلمات في بيانات التدريب ، وملء قوائم hypernym للكلمة الاختبارية بقائمة hypernym في مجموعة التدريب لأقرب مسافة تشابه لكلمة الاختبار . في SemEval 2018 Task9 ، حققت نتائجنا المرتبة الأولى في اللغة الإسبانية ، والثانية في اللغة الإيطالية ، والسادسة في اللغة الإنجليزية في مقياس MAP.', 'fr': "La découverte d'hypernym vise à découvrir les ensembles de mots hypernym avec un mot hyponyme et un corpus propre. Cet article propose une méthode simple mais efficace pour la découverte d'ensembles d'hyperonymes basés sur l'incorporation de mots, qui peut être utilisée pour mesurer les similitudes contextuelles entre les mots. À partir d'un mot hyponyme de test, nous obtenons ses listes d'hyperonymes en calculant les similitudes entre le mot hyponyme et les mots dans les données d'entraînement, et nous remplissons les listes d'hyperonymes du mot test avec la liste d'hypernymes dans l'ensemble d'apprentissage de la distance de similarité la plus proche du mot test. Dans la tâche9 de SemEval 2018, nos résultats sont les suivants\xa0: 1er en espagnol, 2e en italien, 6e en anglais dans la métrique de MAP.", 'es': 'El descubrimiento de Hypernym tiene como objetivo descubrir los conjuntos de palabras de hiperónimos a los que se les da una palabra de hipónimo y un corpus adecuado. Este artículo propone un método simple pero eficaz para el descubrimiento de conjuntos de hiperónimos basados en la incrustación de palabras, que se puede utilizar para medir las similitudes contextuales entre las palabras. Dada una palabra de hipónimo de prueba, obtenemos sus listas de hiperónimos calculando las similitudes entre la palabra de hipónimo y las palabras en los datos de entrenamiento, y rellenamos las listas de hiperónimos de las palabras de prueba con la lista de hiperónimos en el conjunto de entrenamiento de la distancia de similitud más cercana a la palabra de prueba. En la tarea 9 de SemEval 2018, nuestros resultados, alcanzan el primer lugar en español, el segundo en italiano, el sexto en inglés en la métrica de MAP.', 'pt': 'A descoberta de hiperônimos visa descobrir os conjuntos de palavras de hiperônimos a partir de uma palavra de hipônimo e corpus próprio. Este artigo propõe um método simples, mas eficaz, para a descoberta de conjuntos de hiperônimos com base na incorporação de palavras, que pode ser usado para medir as semelhanças contextuais entre palavras. Dada uma palavra de hipônimo de teste, obtemos suas listas de hiperônimos calculando as semelhanças entre a palavra de hipônimo e as palavras nos dados de treinamento e preenchemos as listas de hiperônimos da palavra de teste com a lista de hiperônimos no conjunto de treinamento da distância de similaridade mais próxima da palavra de teste . Na tarefa SemEval 20189, nossos resultados alcançam 1º em espanhol, 2º em italiano, 6º em inglês na métrica de MAP.', 'ja': 'ハイパーニム発見は、ハイパーニムワードセットにハイポニムワードと適切なコーパスが与えられていることを発見することを目的としています。本論文では、単語埋め込みに基づいて、単語間の文脈的類似性を測定するために使用できる、単純でありながら効果的なハイパーニム集合の発見方法を提案した。テストハイポニム単語を使用すると、トレーニングデータ内のハイポニム単語と単語の類似性を計算することにより、そのハイパーニムリストを取得し、テストワードのハイパーニムリストを、テストワードと最も近い類似性距離のトレーニングセット内のハイパーニムリストで埋めます。SemEval 2018 task 9では、マップのメトリックでスペイン語1位、イタリア語2位、英語6位を達成しました。', 'zh': '超名词得旨给定下名词及正语料库超名词集。 本文立一种基于词嵌超名词集见简而有效,可施于量词之上下文相似性。 给定一试下称词,以算练数中下位词、单词间相似性得其超名列表,并于训练集中用与测试词最近者相似性距之超名列表充试词之超名列表。 于SemEval 2018务9,于MAP之指标,于西班牙语为首,于意大利语为第二,于英语为第6。', 'hi': 'Hypernym खोज का उद्देश्य हाइपरनिम शब्द सेट की खोज करना है जो हाइपोनिम शब्द और उचित कॉर्पस दिया गया है। यह पेपर शब्द एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर हाइपरनिम सेट की खोज के लिए एक सरल लेकिन प्रभावी विधि का प्रस्ताव करता है, जिसका उपयोग शब्दों के बीच प्रासंगिक समानताओं को मापने के लिए किया जा सकता है। एक परीक्षण हाइपोनिम शब्द को देखते हुए, हम प्रशिक्षण डेटा में हाइपोनिम शब्द और शब्दों के बीच समानताओं की गणना करके इसकी हाइपरनिम सूचियों को प्राप्त करते हैं, और परीक्षण शब्द के निकटतम समानता दूरी के प्रशिक्षण सेट में हाइपरनिम सूची के साथ परीक्षण शब्द की हाइपरनिम सूचियों को भरते हैं। SemEval 2018 task9 में, हमारे परिणाम, स्पेनिश पर 1, इतालवी पर 2, MAP के मीट्रिक में अंग्रेजी पर 6 वें स्थान पर प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Гипернимическое открытие направлено на открытие наборов гипернимических слов с учетом гипонимического слова и правильного тела. В данной работе предлагается простой, но эффективный метод обнаружения гипернимовых множеств на основе вложения слов, который может быть использован для измерения контекстного сходства между словами. Учитывая слово тестового гипонима, мы получаем его гипернимные списки, вычисляя сходства между словом гипонима и словами в обучающих данных, и заполняем гипернимные списки тестового слова гипернимным списком в обучающем наборе ближайшего к тестовому слову расстояния сходства. В задаче SemEval 20189 наши результаты: достичь 1-го на испанском, 2-го на итальянском, 6-го на английском в метрике КАРТЫ.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag fionnachtain hipearnaim na tacair focal hipearnam a fháil amach nuair a thugtar focal hyponym agus corpas cuí. Molann an páipéar seo modh simplí ach éifeachtach chun tacair hipirnéime a aimsiú bunaithe ar leabú focal, ar féidir a úsáid chun cosúlachtaí comhthéacsúla idir focail a thomhas. I bhfianaise focal comhainm tástála, faighimid a liostaí hipearnainmneacha trí na cosúlachtaí idir an focal comhainm agus na focail sna sonraí oiliúna a ríomh, agus liostaí hipearnam an fhocail tástála a líonadh leis an liosta hipearnaim sa tacar oiliúna den achar cosúlachta is gaire don fhocal tástála. . I dtasc SemEval 20189, bainimid amach ár dtorthaí, an 1ú háit ar an Spáinnis, an 2ú háit ar an Iodáilis, an 6ú háit ar an mBéarla i méadrach an MAP.', 'el': 'Η ανακάλυψη υπερνύμων στοχεύει στην ανακάλυψη των συνόλων υπερνύμων λέξεων που δίνονται σε μια υπονύμη λέξη και κατάλληλο σώμα. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική μέθοδο για την ανακάλυψη συνόλων υπερνύμων με βάση την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, η οποία μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για τη μέτρηση των συναφών ομοιοτήτων μεταξύ λέξεων. Δεδομένου μιας λέξης υπονύμων δοκιμής, παίρνουμε τις λίστες υπερνύμων υπολογίζοντας τις ομοιότητες μεταξύ της λέξης και των λέξεων στα δεδομένα κατάρτισης, και συμπληρώνουμε τις λίστες υπερνύμων της λέξης δοκιμής με τη λίστα υπερνύμων στο σύνολο κατάρτισης της πλησιέστερης απόστασης ομοιότητας με τη λέξη δοκιμής. Στην εργασία μας, τα αποτελέσματά μας, επιτυγχάνουν 1η στα ισπανικά, 2η στα ιταλικά, 6η στα αγγλικά στη μέτρηση του ΜΑΡ.', 'ka': 'ჰიპერნიმის აღმოჩენის მიზეზია, რომ ჰიპერნიმის სიტყვების აღმოჩენა, რომელიც ჰიპონიმის სიტყვები და სწორი კორპუსი იყო. ეს დოკუნტი უფრო მაგრამ ეფექტიური მეტი ჰიპერნიმის კონტექსტური სიტყვების შესახებ, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოყენება სიტყვების შესახებ, რომელიც სიტყვების შორ ტესტის ჰიპონიმის სიტყვის შემდეგ, ჩვენ მივიღეთ მისი ჰიპერნიმის სიტყვის, რომელიც ჰიპონიმის სიტყვის და სიტყვის შემდეგი სიტყვის შემდეგი სიტყვის და ტესტის სიტყვის ჰიპერნიმის სიტყვის ჰიპერნიმის სიტყვის, რო 2018 წლის SemEval-ში, ჩვენი შედეგები, პირველი სპანელში, მეორე იტალიოში, მეორე ინგლისოში, მეორე მეტრიკში MAP-ში.', 'hu': 'A hipernim felfedezés célja, hogy felfedezze a hipernim szókészleteket, amelyek egy hipernim szót és a megfelelő korpuszt adnak. Ez a tanulmány egy egyszerű, de hatékony módszert javasol a szóbeágyazáson alapuló hipernímkészletek felfedezésére, amely használható a szavak kontextuális hasonlóságainak mérésére. Egy teszt hiponnim szót adott esetben a hiponnim szó és a szavak közötti hasonlóságok kiszámításával kapjuk meg a hiponnim listákat a képzési adatokban, és a teszt szó hipernim listáját kitöltjük a teszt szóhoz legközelebbi hasonlósági távolság készletében található hipernim listával. A SemEval 2018 feladat9 eredményeink az első spanyol, a második olasz, a hatodik angol a MAP metrikájában érnek el.', 'kk': 'Хипернимді табу мақсатты гипернимді сөздер мен дұрыс корпус келтірілген сөздерді табу. Бұл қағаз сөздерді ендіру үшін қарапайым, бірақ эффективті әдісін табуға арналады. Бұл сөздер арасындағы контексті ұқсастықтарын өлшеу үшін қолданылады. Сынақ гипернимдік сөздерді біз гипернимдік тізімдерін оқыту деректерінде гипернимдік сөздер мен сөздер арасындағы ұқсастығын есептеп, сынақтағы сөздердің гипернимдік тізімін тексеру сөзіне ең жақын ұқсастығының қашықтығын гипернимдік тіз 2018 жылдың semiEval тапсырма9, нәтижелеріміз Испан тілінде 1-ші, 2-ші итальяндағы, 6-ші ағылшын тілінде MAP метрикалығында жеткізеді.', 'it': "Hypernym discovery mira a scoprire gli insiemi di parole ipernym dati una parola iponima e un corpus appropriato. Questo articolo propone un metodo semplice ma efficace per la scoperta di insiemi di ipernimi basati sull'embedding di parole, che possono essere utilizzati per misurare le somiglianze contestuali tra le parole. Data una parola iponima test, otteniamo le relative liste di ipernimi calcolando le somiglianze tra la parola iponima e le parole nei dati di allenamento, e riempiamo le liste di ipernimi della parola test con l'elenco di ipernimi nel set di allenamento della distanza di somiglianza più vicina alla parola test. In SemEval 2018 task9, i nostri risultati, raggiungono 1 ° in spagnolo, 2 ° in italiano, 6 ° in inglese nella metrica di MAP.", 'lt': 'Hipernimo atradimas siekia atrasti hipernimo žodžių rinkinius, kurie duoda hiponimo žodį ir tinkamą korpusą. Šiame dokumente siūlomas paprastas, bet veiksmingas hipernimų rinkinių nustatymo metodas, pagrįstas žodžių įterpimu, kuris gali būti naudojamas kontekstiniams žodžių panašumams matuoti. Atsižvelgdami į bandomąjį hiponimo žodį, mes gauname jo hipernimo s ąrašus apskaičiuodami panašumą tarp hiponimo žodžio ir žodžių mokymo duomenys, ir užpildysime bandomojo žodžio hipernimo sąrašus hipernimo sąrašu mokymo rinkinyje, kuris yra artimiausias panašumo atstumas bandomajam žodžiui. 2018 m. SemEval uždavinyje9 mūsų rezultatai pasiekti pirmąjį Ispanijos, antrąjį Italijos, šeštąjį anglų kalbos MAP.', 'ms': 'Penemuan hipernim bermaksud untuk menemukan set perkataan hipernim diberi perkataan hiponym dan corpus yang betul. Kertas ini mencadangkan kaedah sederhana tetapi berkesan untuk penemuan set hipernim berdasarkan penyambungan perkataan, yang boleh digunakan untuk mengukur persamaan kontekstual antara perkataan. Dengan kata hiponym ujian, kita dapat senarai hiponymnya dengan mengira persamaan antara perkataan hiponym dan perkataan dalam data latihan, dan mengisi senarai hipernim perkataan ujian dengan senarai hipernim dalam set latihan jarak persamaan terdekat kepada perkataan ujian. Dalam SemEval 2018 tugas9, hasil kita, mencapai 1 dalam bahasa Sepanyol, 2 dalam bahasa Itali, 6 dalam bahasa Inggeris dalam metrik MAP.', 'ml': 'ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിമം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമിന്\u200dറെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഒരു ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമ വാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള സാധാരണകള്\u200d അളക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഹൈപ്രെനിമിന്റെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന് ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ ടെസ്റ്റ് ഹൈപ്പെനിമ് വാക്ക് കൊണ്ട്, പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വാക്കും വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള പോലെയുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണക്ക് ചെയ്ത് പരീക്ഷ വാക്കിന്റെ ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമിന്റെ പട സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക്ക് 9 ല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സ്പാനിഷില്\u200d ഒന്നാമത്തേതാണ് എത്തുക, ഇറ്റലിയനില്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തേത്, ആറാമത്തേത് ഇംഗ്ല', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta ta’ ipernimi għandha l-għan li tiskopri settijiet ta’ kliem ipernimi mogħtija kelma iponimi u korpus xieraq. Dan id-dokument jipproponi metodu sempliċi iżda effettiv għall-iskoperta ta’ settijiet ipernimi bbażati fuq l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem, li jista’ jintuża biex jitkejlu s-similaritajiet kuntestwali bejn il-kliem. Minħabba kelma iponimika tat-test, a ħna niksbu l-listi tal-iperinimi tagħha billi nikkalkulaw is-similaritajiet bejn il-kelma iponimika u l-kliem fid-dejta tat-taħriġ, u nimlew il-listi tal-iperinimi tal-kelma tat-test bil-list a tal-iperinimi fis-sett tat-taħriġ tal-eqreb distanza ta’ similarità mal-kelma tat-test. In SemEval 2018 task9, our results, achieve 1st on Spanish, 2nd on Italian, 6th on English in the metric of MAP.', 'mk': 'Хипернимското откритие има за цел откритие на хипернимските зборови кои даваат хипонимски збор и соодветен корпус. Оваа хартија предложува едноставен, но ефикасен метод за откривање на сетови на хиперними базирани на вградување на зборови, кој може да се користи за мерење на контекстните сличности помеѓу зборовите. Со оглед на тестираниот збор за хиперними, ги добиваме неговите листи со хиперними со пресметка на сличностите помеѓу Во задачата SemEval 2018, нашите резултати, достигнуваат 1 на шпански, 2 на италијански, 6 на англиски во метрика на MAP.', 'pl': 'Odkrycie hipernimu ma na celu odkrycie zbiorów słów hipernimu podanych słowom hiponimu i właściwym korpusem. W artykule zaproponowano prostą, ale skuteczną metodę odkrywania zbiorów hipernimów opartą na osadzeniu słów, która może być wykorzystana do pomiaru kontekstowych podobieństw między słowami. Biorąc pod uwagę słowo hiponimu testowego, otrzymujemy jego listy hipernimów obliczając podobieństwa między słowem hiponimu a słowami w danych treningowych i wypełniamy listy hipernimów słowa testowego listą hipernimów w zestawie treningowym o najbliższej odległości podobieństwa do słowa testowego. W SemEval 2018 zadania9 nasze wyniki osiągają pierwszy na hiszpańskim, drugi na włoskim, szósty na angielskim w metryce MAP.', 'no': 'Hypernymoppdaging måtar å oppdaga hypernymordet som er gitt ein hyponym ord og rett korpus. Denne papiret foreslår ein enkel, men effektiv metode for oppdaging av hypernymsett basert på ordinnbygging, som kan brukast til å måle kontekstlike likningar mellom ord. Gjennomsiktig eit testhyponymsord, får vi hypernymlister sitt ved å rekna ut liknande mellom hyponymsordet og ord i øvingsdata, og fylle hypernym list a over testordet med hypernymlista i øvingssettet av den næraste liknande avstanden til testordet. I semiEval 2018 oppgåve9, resultatet våre er første på spansk, andre på italiansk, sekste på engelsk i MAP-metrikken.', 'mn': 'Хиперним нээлтийн зорилго нь гиперним үгийг гиперним үг болон зөв корпус өгсөн үгийг олох зорилго юм. Энэ цаас нь хэлний хоорондын харьцангуй адилтгалыг хэмжихэд хэрэглэх боломжтой гиперним хэлбэрүүдийг олохын тулд энгийн боловч эффективны аргыг санал болгодог. Тест гиперним үг болон сургалтын өгөгдлийн хоорондын ижил хэмжээсүүдийг гиперним жагсаалттай тооцоолж, шалгалтын гиперним жагсаалт нь тест үгсийн хамгийн ойрхон ижил хэмжээсүүдийн хоорондын ижил хэмжээсүүдийг гиперним жагсаалттай дүүргэдэг. 2018 оны SemEval-д бидний үр дүн нь 1-р Испанийн, 2-р Италиан, 6-р Англи хэлний МаП-ын метрик дээр гарч ирсэн.', 'ro': 'Descoperirea hipernimului își propune să descopere seturile de cuvinte hipernimice date unui cuvânt hiponim și corpus propriu. Această lucrare propune o metodă simplă, dar eficientă pentru descoperirea seturilor de hipernime bazate pe încorporarea cuvintelor, care pot fi folosite pentru a măsura asemănările contextuale dintre cuvinte. Având în vedere un cuvânt hiponim test, obținem listele sale de hipernim calculând asemănările dintre cuvântul hiponim și cuvintele din datele de antrenament și completam listele de hipernim ale cuvântului test cu lista de hipernim din setul de antrenament a celei mai apropiate distanțe de similaritate față de cuvântul test. În sarcina SemEval 20189, rezultatele noastre, obțin 1 la limba spaniolă, 2 la limba italiană, 6 la limba engleză în metrica MAP.', 'si': 'හායිපර්නිම් හොයාගන්න අදහස් කරනවා හායිපර්නිම් වචනය සහ හොඳ කොර්පස් වචනය හොයාගන්න. මේ පැත්තේ සාමාන්\u200dය නමුත් පරීක්ෂක විධානයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වචන සම්බන්ධ විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒක වචන අත පරීක්ෂණය හැයිපෝනිම් වචනය, අපි එයාගේ හායිපාර්නිම් ලැයිස්තුවක් ගණන් කරනවා හායිපෝනිම් වචනය සහ වචනය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය දත්තේ, සහ පරීක්ෂණය වචනයේ හායිපාර් සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩේ 9, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, ස්පැනිෂ්, 2වැනි ඉතාලියාන් වල, 6වැනි ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාන් වල MAP වලින් ඉං', 'sv': 'Hypernym Discovery syftar till att upptäcka hypernym orduppsättningar som ges ett hyponym ord och korrekt corpus. Denna uppsats föreslår en enkel men effektiv metod för upptäckt av hypernymuppsättningar baserade på ordinbäddning, som kan användas för att mäta kontextuella likheter mellan ord. Givet ett testhyponymsord får vi dess hypernymlistor genom att beräkna likheterna mellan hyponymsordet och orden i träningsdata, och fyller testordets hypernymlistor med hypernymlistan i träningsuppsättningen av närmaste likhetsavstånd till testordet. I SemEval 2018 uppgift9 uppnår våra resultat 1:a på spanska, 2:a på italienska, 6:e på engelska i mätaren MAP.', 'sr': 'Hipernim otkriće je cilj da otkrije hipernim reèima pod hiponim reèima i pravim korpusom. Ovaj papir predlaže jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu otkrivanja hipernimskih setova na osnovu uključenih reči, koja se može koristiti za mjerenje kontekstualnih sličnosti između reči. S obzirom na test hiponim reč, dobijemo njegove hipernimne liste računaljući sličnosti između hiponimske riječi i reči u podacima o obuci, i ispuniti liste hipernimskih reči s a listom hipernimskih reči u setu obuke najbliže udaljenosti sličnosti prema testnoj reči. U semiEvalu 2018, naši rezultati postignu 1 na španjolskom, 2 na italijanskom, 6 na engleskom u metriku MAP-a.', 'so': 'Finnishka Hypernym wuxuu ku qoran yahay in uu soo ogaado hadalka hypernymiga oo la siiyo hadal hyponym ah iyo korpus sax ah. Warqaddaas wuxuu soo jeedaa qaab fudud laakiin shaqo badan oo ku saabsan soo ogaashada qoraalka hypernym, kaas oo lagu isticmaali karo in lagu qiyaaso isku mid ah hadallada dhexdooda. Hadii loo imtixaamo hyponym, waxaynu helaynaa liiska hypernym si siman u dhexeeya hadalka hyponymimka iyo erayada waxbarashada, waxaana buuxinaynaa liiska imtixaanka oo ku qoran liiska hypernym ee ku qoran sameynta safarka u dhow ee imtixaanka. Shaqooyinkayada ee SemEval 2018 waxaa laga helaa fasaxyada 1aad Isbanish, 2aad Italian, 6aad Ingiriis oo ku qoran maamulka MAP.', 'ur': 'Hypernym discovery aims to discover the hypernym word sets given a hyponym word and proper corpus. This paper proposes a simple but effective method for the discovery of hypernym sets based on word embedding, which can be used to measure the contextual similarities between words. ایک آزمائش ہیپونیم لکھ کے ذریعہ، ہم اس کے ہیپر نیم لکھ لیتے ہیں، ہیپونیم لکھ اور کلمات کے درمیان تدریس دکھانے کے اندر برابری کا شمار کر رہے ہیں، اور آزمائش لکھ کے ہیپر نیم لکھ لیستوں کو آزمائش لکھ کر آزمائش لکھ کے زیادہ قریب ترین برابری دور کی سیمیوئل 2018 میں ہمارے نتیجے، اسپانیایی پر پہلے پہلے پہنچ گئے، ایتالیایی پر دوسرے، ماپ کے متریک میں انگلیسی پر چھٹے.', 'ta': 'ஹைப்பர்னிம் கண்டுபிடிப்பது ஹைப்பர்னிம் சொல்லு அமைப்பை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் தெரியும் தெரியும். இந்த தாள் ஒரு எளிய ஆனால் பயனுள்ள முறைமையை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் சொல் உள்ளடக்கத்தை அடிப்படையில் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான சுலபமான ஆனால் தேவையா ஒரு சோதனையின் ஹைப்பர்னிம் வார்த்தையை கொண்டு, பயிற்சி தரவில் ஒத்திசைகளை கணிப்பிடித்து அதிகப்பெரும் பட்டியலை கிடைக்கும், சோதனை வார்த்தையின் ஹைப்பர்னிம் பட்டியலை சோதனை  செம்வால் 2018 செயல்பாட்டில், எங்கள் முடிவுகள், சிப்பானிஷ் மீது முதல் அடையும், இத்தாலியன் மீது இரண்டாவது, ஆங்கிலத்தில் 6வது MAP மெட்', 'uz': "Hypernym aniqlanishni aniqlash uchun hyponym so'zlari va haqiqiqiy corpus tilida hypernym so'zlarini aniqlash mumkin. Bu qogʻoz soʻzni kiritish uchun oddiy va effektiv usulni aniqlash imkoniyatini tahrirlash imkoniyatini beradi. Bu so'zlar orasidagi soʻzlarni oʻzgartirish mumkin. Given a test hyponym word, we get its hypernym lists by computing the similarities between the hyponym word and words in the training data, and fill the test word's hypernym lists with the hypernym list in the training set of the nearest similarity distance to the test word.  SemEval 2018 vazifalarini 9 yilda, natijalarimiz Ispanchaga birinchi bo'ladi, Italyaning ikkinchi, Inglizcha 6 chi inglizcha MAP metrikida.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện Hypernym là mục tiêu để tìm thấy các môi trường chữ cao được dùng từ giảm âm và cơ thể thực tế. Tờ giấy này đề xuất một phương pháp đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả để phát hiện các tập hợp siêu năng dựa trên sự nhúng vào từ, có thể được dùng để đo các điểm tương đồng các từ. Dựa vào từ giảm âm thử, chúng ta có danh s ách siêu âm của nó bằng cách tính to án các điểm tương đồng giữa từ giảm âm và từ trong dữ liệu huấn luyện, và điền vào danh sách siêu âm của từ thử nghiệm cùng với danh sách các siêu âm trong tập luyện của khoảng cách tương tự gần nhất với từ thử nghiệm. Ở SemEvl 208 Task9, kết quả của chúng tôi, đạt được thứ nhất trên tiếng Tây Ban Nha, thứ hai trên Ý, thứ sáu bằng tiếng Anh theo thước đo MAP.', 'bg': 'Откриването на хиперними има за цел да открие хипернимните слова, дадени на хипноним дума и подходящ корпус. Тази статия предлага прост, но ефективен метод за откриване на хипернимни набори, базирани на вграждане на думи, които могат да бъдат използвани за измерване на контекстуалните прилики между думите. Като се има предвид тестовата дума хипноним, получаваме нейните списъци с хипноними, като изчисляваме приликите между хипнонимната дума и думите в тренировъчните данни и попълваме списъците с хипнонимни на тестовата дума със списъка с хипноними в тренировъчния набор на най-близкото разстояние за сходство с тестовата дума. В задача 2018, нашите резултати, постигат 1-во на испански, 2-ро на италиански, 6-о на английски в метриката на МАП.', 'nl': 'Hyperniem discovery heeft tot doel de hyperniem woordensets te ontdekken die een hyponiem woord en een eigen corpus krijgen. Dit artikel stelt een eenvoudige maar effectieve methode voor voor de ontdekking van hyperniemsets gebaseerd op woord embedding, die kan worden gebruikt om de contextuele overeenkomsten tussen woorden te meten. Als een testhyponiemwoord wordt gegeven, krijgen we de hyperniemwoord lijsten door de overeenkomsten tussen het hyponiemwoord en woorden in de trainingsgegevens te berekenen, en vullen we de hyperniemlijsten van het testwoord met de hyperniemlijst in de trainingsset van de dichtstbijzijnde gelijkenissafstand aan het testwoord. In SemEval 2018 taak9 bereiken onze resultaten 1e op Spaans, 2e op Italiaans, 6e op Engels in de metric van MAP.', 'da': 'Hypernym opdagelse har til formål at opdage hypernym ordsæt givet et hyponym ord og ordentlig korpus. Denne artikel foreslår en enkel, men effektiv metode til opdagelse af hypernymsæt baseret på ordindlejring, som kan bruges til at måle kontekstuelle ligheder mellem ord. Givet et test hyponym ord, får vi dens hypernymlister ved at beregne lighederne mellem hyponym ord og ord i træningsdataene, og udfylder testordets hypernymlister med hypernymlisten i træningssættet af den nærmeste lighedsafstand til testordet. I SemEval 2018 task9 opnår vores resultater 1. på spansk, 2. på italiensk, 6. på engelsk i metrikken for MAP.', 'de': 'Hypernym discovery zielt darauf ab, die Hypernym-Wortsätze zu entdecken, die einem Hyponym-Wort und einem richtigen Korpus gegeben sind. Diese Arbeit schlägt eine einfache, aber effektive Methode zur Entdeckung von Hypernymsätzen vor, die auf der Einbettung von Wörtern basiert, mit der die kontextuellen Ähnlichkeiten zwischen Wörtern gemessen werden können. Bei einem Testhyponymwort erhalten wir seine Hypernymlisten, indem wir die Ähnlichkeiten zwischen dem Hyponymwort und den Wörtern in den Trainingsdaten berechnen, und füllen die Hypernymlisten des Testworts mit der Hypernymliste im Trainingssatz mit dem nächstgelegenen Ähnlichkeitsabstand zum Testwort aus. In SemEval 2018 task9 erreichen unsere Ergebnisse den ersten auf Spanisch, den zweiten auf Italienisch, den sechsten auf Englisch in der Metrik MAP.', 'hr': 'Hipernimu otkriće cilj je otkriti hipernimu riječ pod hiponim riječima i odgovarajućim korpusom. Ovaj papir predlaže jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu otkrivanja hipernimskih setova na temelju uključenih riječi, koja se može koristiti za mjerenje contextualnih sličnosti između riječi. S obzirom na test hiponim riječ, dobijemo njegove hipernimne liste računaljući sličnosti između hiponimske riječi i riječi u podacima o obuci i ispuniti liste hipernimnih riječi s a popisom hipernimnih riječi u skupini obuke najbliže udaljenosti sličnosti na testnu riječ. U pola izvještaja9, naši rezultati postignu 1 na španjolskom, 2 na italijanskom, 6 na engleskom jeziku na metriku MAP-a.', 'id': 'Penemuan hipernim bermaksud untuk menemukan set kata hipernim diberikan kata hiponym dan corpus yang tepat. Kertas ini mengusulkan metode sederhana tapi efektif untuk penemuan set hipernim berdasarkan penerbangan kata, yang dapat digunakan untuk mengukur persamaan kontekstual antara kata. Dengan kata hiponym ujian, kita mendapatkan daftar hiponymnya dengan menghitung persamaan antara kata hiponym dan kata-kata dalam data latihan, dan mengisi daftar hipernim kata ujian dengan daftar hipernim dalam set latihan jarak persamaan terdekat dengan kata ujian. In SemEval 2018 task9, our results, achieve 1st on Spanish, 2nd on Italian, 6th on English in the metric of MAP.', 'ko': '초의어 발견의 목적은 하의어와 적당한 어료 라이브러리를 정한 상황에서 초의어집을 발견하는 것이다.본고는 단어가 삽입된 초의어집을 바탕으로 발견하는 방법을 제시했는데 이 방법은 단어 간의 상하문 유사성을 측정할 수 있다.테스트 하위어를 정합니다. 우리는 하위어와 훈련 데이터 중의 단어 간의 유사도를 계산하여 그 상위어 목록을 얻고, 훈련집중과 테스트어가 가장 가까운 유사도를 계산하여 테스트어의 상위어 목록을 채웁니다.SemEval 2018 task9에서 우리의 결과는 지도의 도량으로 스페인어 1위, 이탈리아어 2위, 영어 6위였다.', 'fa': 'کشف هايپر نيم هدف اينه که کلمه هايپر نيم رو کشف کنه که کلمه هايپر نيم رو به يه کلمه هيپونيم و قالب درست بده این کاغذ یک روش ساده اما تاثیر برای کشف مجموعه های هیپر نیم بر اساس جمع کردن کلمه استفاده می\u200cکند که می\u200cتواند برای اندازه\u200cگیری شبیه\u200cهای موضوع بین کلمه\u200cها استفاده شود. با توجه به یک کلمه هیپونیم آزمایش، لیستهای هیپورنیم آن را با محاسبه کردن شبیه\u200cهای بین کلمه هیپونیم و کلمه\u200cها در داده\u200cهای آموزش، می\u200cگیریم، و لیستهای هیپورنیم کلمه آزمایش را با لیست هیپر نیم در مجموعه آموزش نزدیکترین فاصله شبیه\u200cای با کلمه آزمایش پر کنیم. در شمیEval ۲۰۱۸، نتیجه\u200cهای ما، ۱ در اسپانیایی، ۲ در ایتالیایی، ۶ در انگلیسی در متریک MAP رسید.', 'sw': 'Hypernym discovery aims to discover the hypernym word sets given a hyponym word and proper corpus.  Gazeti hili linapendekeza njia rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi wa kutambua mifumo ya umeme kwa msingi wa maneno yanayotengenezwa, ambayo inaweza kutumika kupunguza sawa na maneno yanayofanana. Kwa kuzingatia neno la upinzani, tunapata orodha yake ya ubora kwa kuzingatia sawa kati ya maneno na maneno ya upinzani katika taarifa za mafunzo, na kuzijaza orodha ya ujumbe wa neno la upungufu katika mfumo wa mafunzo wa karibu na umbali wa usawa wa neno la jaribio. Nchini SemEval 2018, matokeo yetu, yanafanikiwa kwa mara ya kwanza katika lugha ya Kihispania, ya pili katika Kiitalia, na ya 6 katika Kiingereza kwa lugha ya MAP.', 'tr': 'Hipernim a çylyk hipernim sözlerini hiponym sözlerine we dogry korpusa berilen sözlerini keşfetmek amaçlary. Bu kagyz hipernim sözlerine daşary ýagdaýlaşyk üçin basit ýöne etkinlik bir yöntemi teklip edýär. Bu sözler aralygynda durmuş ýagdaýlary ölçüp ulanyp bilýär. Bir hiponym s özüne görä, hipernim sözlerini ve okuwçylyk berüvlerinde ýakynlaşyklaryny hasaplap eden hipernim listelerine elimizde bar we test sözleriniň en yakın meňzeşliklerini test sözlerine doldur. 2018-nji ýylda SemEval takyklarymyz9 netijelerimiz, ispanyýada 1-nji, 2-nji italiýada, 6-nji iňlisçe MAP metriýasynda ýetip bardyk.', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i hipernimeve synon të zbulojë fjalën e hipernimeve të dhëna një fjalë hiponimi dhe një korpus të përshtatshëm. Ky dokument propozon një metodë të thjeshtë por efektive për zbulimin e grupeve hipernime bazuar në përfshirjen e fjalëve, e cila mund të përdoret për të matur ngjashmëritë kontekstuale midis fjalëve. Duke u dhënë një fjalë hipronimi testi, ne marrim listat e saj hiprinimi duke llogaritur ngjashmëritë midis fjalës hiponimi dhe fjalëve në të dhënat e stërvitjes, dhe mbushim listat e fjalës testuese me list ën e hiprinimit në grupin e stërvitjes s ë distancës më të afërt të ngjashmërisë me fjalën testuese. Në detyrën SemEval 2018, rezultatet tona arrijnë të parën në spanjoll, të dytën në italian, të gjashtën në anglisht në metrikën e MAP.', 'hy': 'Հիպերնիմների հայտնագործությունը նպատակն է հայտնաբերել հիպերնիմների բառերի համակարգերը, որոնք հիպերնիմների բառ են տալիս և ճիշտ մարմին: Այս թղթին առաջարկում է պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ մեթոդ հիպերնիմային համակարգերի հայտնաբերելու համար, հիմնված բառերի ներդրման վրա, որը կարող է օգտագործվել բառերի միջև կոնտեքստային նմանությունների չափման համար: Հիպերնիմների ցուցակները հաշվարկելով հիպերնիմների բառի և փորձարկման տվյալների բառերի նմանությունները, և լրացնելով փորձարկման բառի հիպերնիմների ցուցակները փորձարկման բառի նման ամենամոտ հեռավորության ցուցակում գտնվող հիպերնիմների ցուցակում: 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" խնդիրում մեր արդյունքները հասնում են 1-ին իսպաներեն, 2-ին իսպաներեն, 6-ին անգլերեն MAP-ի մետրիկայում:', 'am': 'የHypernym ቃላት የኤፍሬኒም ቃል እና የክሮፓስ ቃላት መግለጫ ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ይህም ፕሮግራም ቃላት በንግግር ውስጥ የሚደረገውን ቃላት መግለጫ የሚያስፈልገውን ቀላል ነገር ግን የሚያስፈልገውን የፊርኒም ማግኘት የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡ በተፈተና hypoኒም ቃላት ቢሆን፣ የhypoንnym ቃልና ቃላት በሚያስተምር ዳታ መካከል በሚመስል ዝርዝር እናደርጋለን፣ የፈተናውን ቃላት የhypernym ዝርዝር በተቀረበ በተፈተናው ቃላት ላይ በሚመስል ርቀት እና ለፈተናው ቃል መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሴምEval 2018 ስርዓት 9፣ ፍሬዎቻችን በስፓኒሽ ላይ 1ኛ፣ ሁለተኛ በጣሊያንኛ፣ 6ኛ በመንግሊዝኛ በአሜሪካ ማተሚያ ላይ አግኝተዋል፡፡', 'bn': 'হাইপার্নিম আবিষ্কারের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে হাইপার্নিম শব্দের সেট খুঁজে বের করার জন্য যা হাইপার্নিম শব্দ এবং সঠ এই প্রবন্ধে একটি সহজ কিন্তু কার্যকর পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিতে হাইপারেনিম সেট আবিষ্কারের জন্য, যা শব্দের মধ প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যের মধ্যে হাইপারেনিম শব্দ এবং শব্দগুলোর মধ্যে একই ধরনের তালিকা গণনা করে আমরা তার হাইপারেনিমের তালিকা পেয়েছি এবং পরীক্ষা শব্দের হাইপারেনিম তালিকা পূর্ণ কর সেমইভাল ২০১৮ সালের কাজে আমাদের ফলাফল স্প্যানিশে প্রথম অর্জন করা হয়েছে, যা ইতালিয়ান দ্বিতীয়, ইংরেজী ভাষায় ৬ম ইংরেজিতে মাপির ম', 'az': 'Hipernim keşfini hipernim sözlərinin və düzgün korpusa verilən sözləri keşfetməyə niyyət edir. Bu kağıt sözlərin arasındakı müxtəlif bənzərini ölçmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Testin hiponim s özü ilə, hipernim sözü və sözlərin arasındakı bənzəri hesablayaraq, sınama sözünün hipernim listesini test sözünə ən yaxın bənzəri uzağının təhsil edilməsi ilə hipernim listesindən doldururuq. 2018-ci SemEval işimizdə, sonuçlarımız İspanyolca 1-ci, İtalya 2-ci, MAP metriklərində İngilizce 6-ci işə yetişir.', 'bs': 'Hipernim otkriće je cilj da otkrije hipernimnu riječ pod hiponim riječima i pravim korpusom. Ovaj papir predlaže jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu otkrivanja hipernimskih setova na osnovu uključenih riječi, koja se može koristiti za mjerenje kontekstualne sličnosti između riječi. S obzirom na test hiponim riječ, dobijemo njegove hipernimne liste računaljući sličnosti između hiponimske riječi i riječi u podacima o obuci, i ispuniti liste hipernimnih riječi s a listom hipernimnih riječi u setu obuke najbliže udaljenosti sličnosti prema testnoj riječi. U semiEvalu 2018, naši rezultati postignu 1 na španjolskom, 2 na italijanskom, 6 na engleskom u metriku MAP-a.', 'cs': 'Zjištění hypernymů má za cíl objevit množiny hypernymů, které jsou přidány hyponymnímu slovu a vlastnímu korpusu. Tento článek navrhuje jednoduchou, ale efektivní metodu pro zjištění množin hypernymů založených na vložení slov, kterou lze použít k měření kontextových podobností mezi slovy. Vzhledem k testovacímu hyponymu slovu získáme jeho seznamy hypernymů výpočtem podobností mezi hyponymním slovem a slovy v tréninkových datech a vyplníme seznamy hypernymů testovacího slova seznamem hypernymů v tréninkové sadě o nejbližší podobnostní vzdálenosti ke zkušebnímu slovu. V SemEval 2018 task9, naše výsledky, dosahují prvního na španělštině, druhého na italštině, šestého na angličtině v metrice MAP.', 'et': 'H체pern체체mide avastamise eesm채rk on avastada h체pern체체mide s천nakomplektid, millele antakse h체pn체체ms천na ja korpus. K채esolev t철철 pakub v채lja lihtsa, kuid t천husa meetodi h체pern체체mide kogumite avastamiseks, mis p천hineb s천nade manustamisel, mida saab kasutada s천nade kontekstiliste sarnasuste m천천tmiseks. Testi h체pn체체ms천na puhul saame selle h체pn체체ms천na nimekirjad arvutades h체pn체체ms천na ja s천nade sarnasused treeningandmetes ning t채idame testis천na h체pn체체mnimekirjad h체pn체체mse nimekirjaga treeningkomplektis, kus on testis천nale l채him sarnasuse kaugus. SemEval 2018 체lesandes9 saavutavad meie tulemused 1. Hispaania, 2. Itaalia, 6. inglise keeles MAP meetrikus.', 'ca': "El descobriment d'hipernim té l'objectiu de descobrir els conjunts de paraules hipernims donats una paraula hiponyma i un cos adequat. Aquest article propon un mètode simple però efectiu per descobrir conjunts d'hipernims basats en l'incorporació de paraules, que pot ser utilitzat per mesurar les similituds contextuals entre paraules. Dant una paraula d'hipernim d'exàmens, obtenim les seves llistes d'hipernim calculant les similituds entre la paraula d'hiponym i les paraules de les dades d'entrenament, i omplem les llistes d'hipernim de la paraula d'exàmens amb la llista d'hipernim del conjunt d'entrenament de la distància de similitud més propera a la paraula d'exàmens. A SemEval 2018, els nostres resultats van aconseguir el primer en espanyol, el segon en italià, el sexte en anglès en la mètrica del MAP.", 'af': "Hypernyme-ontdekking doel doen om die hipernyme woord te ontdek wat 'n hiponime woord en regte korpus gegee het. Hierdie papier voorstel 'n eenvoudige maar effektief metode vir die ontdekking van hipernim stel gebaseer op woord inbetering, wat kan gebruik word om die kontekslike gelykenisse tussen woorde te maak. Gien 'n toets hiponime woord, kry ons sy hipernim lyste deur die gelykenisse tussen die hiponime woord en woorde in die onderwerp data te bereken, en vul die toets woord se hipernim lyste met die hipernim lys in die onderwerp stel van die nabieste gelykenis afstand tot die toets woord. In SemEval 2018 taak9, ons resultate, bereik 1 op Spaanse, 2 op Italiese, 6 op Engels in die metrie van MAP.", 'fi': 'Hypernyymien löytäminen pyrkii löytämään hypernyymien sanajoukot, joille annetaan hyponyymi sana ja asianmukainen korpus. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta menetelmää sanaupotukseen perustuvien hypernyymijoukkojen löytämiseksi, jota voidaan käyttää mittaamaan sanojen välisiä kontekstuaalisia yhtäläisyyksiä. Kun testihyponyymisana otetaan käyttöön, saamme sen hypernyymiluettelot laskemalla hyponyymisanan ja harjoitustietojen sanojen yhtäläisyydet, ja täytämme testisanan hypernyymiluettelot hypernyymiluettelolla harjoitussarjassa, jossa on lähin samankaltaisuusetäisyys testisanaa. SemEval 2018 -tehtävässä 9 tuloksemme saavuttavat 1. sijan espanjassa, 2. italian, 6. englannin kielen MAP-mittarissa.', 'jv': 'FindOK #a11y <joanie> hello!<joanie> hello! Genjer pernik urip kuwi, kita deweke mellombak alat wiyandik mellombak alat karo hale mellombak alat lan gambaran kuwi nggawe data nggawe, og tolangin langutan wiyandik Samsul, maneh, mengko sampek 1 ing kastilla, 2 ing italian, 6 ing Inggris nang MAP', 'sk': 'Namen odkrivanja hipernimov je odkritje naborov hipernimskih besed, ki jim daje hiponimsko besedo in ustrezno korpus. V prispevku je predlagana preprosta, vendar učinkovita metoda za odkrivanje nizov hipernimov, ki temeljijo na vdelavi besed, s katero se lahko merijo kontekstualne podobnosti med besedami. Glede na preskusno hiponimsko besedo dobimo njene hipernimske sezname tako, da izračunamo podobnosti med hiponimsko besedo in besedami v podatkih o usposabljanju, in izpolnimo preskusne hipernimske sezname s hipernimskim seznamom v naboru usposabljanja z najbližjo podobno razdaljo do preskusne besede. V nalogi SemEval 2018 9, naši rezultati, dosežejo 1. na španščini, 2. na italijanščini, 6. na angleščini v metriki MAP.', 'ha': "Aburin Hypernym na yi amfani da ya gane maganar Hypernym da aka ba da wata kalma mai kyau. Wannan takardar da ke ƙayyade wani metode mai sauƙi amma mai amfani da wa gano na fassarar-raye, a kan da aka yi amfani da shi dõmin a ƙaddara masu daidaita masu cikin magana. Gida wani magana na ƙaranci, za'a sami jerin hisernym ko kuma za mu lissafa kamar masu daidaita a tsakanin maganar Hypernym da magana cikin data na shirin, kuma ka cika jerin hisernym na jarraba da jerin hisernym na cikin shirin tsarin da aka kusantar ta mafi daidaita zuwa maganar jarraba. In SemEV 2018 task9, matsalanmu, za'a sãmu 1 a kan spanish, 2 na a kan Italian, 6 na Ingiriya a metric of MAP.", 'he': 'גילוי היפרנים מתכוון לגלות את המילים היפרנימיות המקומות נתנו מילה היפרנימית וקורפוס הנכון. העבודה הזו מציעה שיטה פשוטה אבל יעילה לגילוי של קבוצות היפרנימים מבוססים על קישום מילים, אשר יכול להשתמש כדי למדוד את הדומות הקונטקטיות בין מילים. בהתחשב במילה היפנימית מבחן, אנו מקבלים את רשימות היפנימים שלה על ידי מחשב את הדומות בין המילה היפנימית למילים במידע האימונים, וממלאים את רשימות היפנימים של המילה הבחן עם רשימת היפנימים במערכת האימונים של מרחק הדומה הקרוב ביותר למילה הבחן. In SemEval 2018 task9, our results, achieve 1st on Spanish, 2nd on Italian, 6th on English in the metric of MAP.', 'bo': "Hypernym discovery aims to discover the hypernym word sets a hyponym word and proper corpus. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཡིག Given a test hyponym word, we get its hypernym list s by computing the similarities between the hyponym word and words in the training data, and fill the test word's hypernym lists with the hypernym list in the training set of the nearest similarity distance to the test word. SemEval 2018 ནང་གི་བྱ་ཚིག9 ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་པ་དེ་སྐད་མའི་སྐད་ཆ་གཅིག་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ། གཞུང་ལིའི་ནང་ནས་དབྱི"}
{'en': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task9 : Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embeddings', 'ar': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 في SemEval-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery باستخدام Hearst Patterns وترددات التكرار المتزامن و Word Embeddings', 'pt': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 em SemEval-2018 Tarefa 9: Descoberta de hiperônimos usando padrões Hearst, frequências de co-ocorrência e incorporação de palavras', 'es': 'Umduluth-CS8761 en SemEval-2018 Task9: Descubrimiento de Hypernym mediante patrones de Hearst, frecuencias de co-ocurrencia e incrustaciones de palabras', 'fr': "Umduluth-CS8761 à SEMEVAL-2018 Task9\xa0: Découverte d'hypernym à l'aide de modèles Hearst, de fréquences de co-occurrence et d'incorporer des mots", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018 Task 9のUMDuluth - CS 8761 ： Hearstパターン、同時発生頻度、Word埋め込みを使用したハイパーニム検出', 'zh': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task9： Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns， Co-occurrence frequency and Word Embeddings', 'hi': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-2018 Task9 पर: Hypernym डिस्कवरी हर्स्ट पैटर्न, सह-घटना आवृत्तियों और वर्ड एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग कर', 'ru': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 на SemEval-2018 Задача 9: Обнаружение гипернима с использованием шаблонов Херста, частот совместного возникновения и вложений слов', 'ga': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 ag SemEval-2018 Tasc9: Fionnachtain Hypernym ag baint úsáide as Patrúin Hearst, minicíochtaí comhtharlaithe agus Leabú Focal', 'ka': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns, Co- occurrence frequencies and Word Embeddings', 'hu': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 a SemEval-2018 feladat9: Hypernym felfedezése Hearst mintákkal, együttes előfordulási gyakoriságokkal és szóbeágyazásokkal', 'el': 'Καθήκον9: Αποκάλυψη υπερνύμων χρησιμοποιώντας μοτίβα Hearst, συχνότητες συνεμφάνισης και ενσωμάτωση λέξεων', 'lt': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embeddings', 'it': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 a SemEval-2018 Task9: scoperta di Hypernym utilizzando modelli Hearst, frequenze di co-occorrenza e incorporazioni di parole', 'kk': 'UMDuluth- CS8761 жарым Eval- 2018 тапсырма9: Hearst үлгілерін қолданатын Hypernym Discovery, Co- occurrence frequencies and Word Embeddings', 'mk': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 на SemEval-2018 задача9: Хипернимско откривање со користење на срцеви шаблони, фреквенции на соопшти појави и вградувања на зборови', 'ms': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 pada SemEval-2018 Tugas9: Penyelidikan Hipernim menggunakan Corak Hati, Frekuensi Kejadian Sama-sama dan Pencampuran Kata', 'mn': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embedding', 'mt': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക്9-ല്\u200d UMDuluth- CS8761: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിംഗ് ഡിസ്ക്വോര്\u200dട്ടി ഹാര്\u200dസ്റ്റ് പാറ്റര്\u200dന്\u200dസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിംഗ് ഡിസ്ക', 'no': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve9: Hypernym Discovery med Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embedding', 'pl': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 w SemEval-2018 Zadania9: Wykrywanie hipernimów przy użyciu wzorców Hearst, częstotliwości współwystępowania i osadzania słów', 'sr': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na pola Evala-2018 Task9: hipernim otkrivanje koristeći Hearst Patterns, frekvencije saradnje i integracije riječi', 'ro': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 la SemEval-2018 Task9: Descoperirea hipernimului folosind modele Hearst, frecvențe de apariție concomitentă și încorporarea cuvintelor', 'so': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery using Heart Patterns, Frequencies Co-occurrence and Word Embedding', 'si': '@ item: inlistbox', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி9 ல் UMDuluth- CS8761: Heart Patterns, Co- occurrence frequencies and Word Embedding', 'sv': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 9: Hypernym Discovery med hjälp av Hearst-mönster, förekomstfrekvenser och Word Embeddings', 'ur': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embeddings', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'UMDulut-CS871 at Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task9: Hypernym Disco, using Hearst patterns, đồng tần số xuất và Word Emberings', 'hr': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na pola Evala-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery koristeći Hearst Patterns, frekvencije spojenosti i uključenje riječi', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Откриване на хиперними с помощта на модели на Хърст, честоти на съвместно появяване и вграждания на думи', 'nl': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 op SemEval-2018 Taak9: Hyperniem Discovery met behulp van Hearst Patterns, Co-voorkomen frequenties en Word Embeddings', 'da': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 på SemEval-2018 Opgave9: Hypernym opdagelse ved hjælp af Hearst-mønstre, hyppighed for samtidig forekomst og Word Embeddings', 'de': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe9: Hypernym-Erkennung mit Hearst-Mustern, Co-Vorkommen-Frequenzen und Word-Einbettungen', 'id': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 di SemEval-2018 Task9: Penemuan Hypernym menggunakan Pattern Hearst, Frekuensi Ko-Kejadian dan Pencampuran Kata', 'fa': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 در ماموریت semiEval-2018: Discovery Hypernym using Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embeddings', 'ko': 'UMDuluth-CS8761이SemEval-18 작업 9: 헤스터 모드, 공통 주파수와 단어를 삽입하여 초어를 발견', 'sw': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 katika Tamko la SemEval-2018: Utafiti wa Hypernym kwa kutumia Wazalendo wa UMDuluth-CS8761', 'tr': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embeddings', 'af': 'UMDuluth- CS8761 by SemEval- 2018 Taak9: Hypernym ontdekking gebruik Hearst Patrone, Co- occurrence frekwensies en Woord Inbetering', 'sq': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 në SemEval-2018', 'az': "SemEval-2018 Task9'də UMDuluth-CS8761: Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence Frequencies və Word Embeddings", 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ টাস্ক ৯-এ ইউএমডুলুথ-সিএস৮৭৬১: হার্স্ট প্যাটার্ন ব্যবহার করে হাইপার্নিম ডিস্কোরি ব্যবহার করে', 'am': 'ስምEval-2018 Task9 ውስጥ UMDuluth-CS8761: Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embedding', 'ca': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 a SemEval-2018 Task9: Descubrir hipernim utilitzant Patrons del Cor, freqüències de coincidència i incorporació de paraules', 'hy': 'Սրտի կաղապարների օգտագործման հիպերնիմի բացահայտումն, համապատասխանատվության հաճախականությունը և բառերի ներգրավումը', 'cs': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na SemEval-2018 Úkol9: Zjištění hypernymů pomocí Hearstových vzorů, frekvencí současného výskytu a vložení slov', 'et': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 9: hüpernüümide avastamine, kasutades Hearsti mustreid, kaasesinemissagedusi ja sõnade manustamist', 'bs': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na pola Evala-2018 Task9: hipernim otkrivanje koristeći Hearst Patterns, frekvencije saradnje i integracije riječi', 'fi': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä9: Hypernyymien löytäminen Hearst-kuvioilla, esiintyvyystaajuuksilla ja sanaupotuksilla', 'jv': 'unit-format', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embeddings', 'sk': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 na SemEval-2018 Naloga9: Odkrivanje hipernimov z uporabo Hearstovih vzorcev, frekvenc soočanja in vdelav besed', 'bo': 'UMDuluth-CS8761 at SemEval-2018 Task9: Hypernym Discovery using Hearst Patterns, Co-occurrence frequencies and Word Embeddings'}
{'en': 'Hypernym Discovery is the task of identifying potential hypernyms for a given term. A hypernym is a more generalized word that is super-ordinate to more specific words. This paper explores several approaches that rely on co-occurrence frequencies of word pairs, Hearst Patterns based on regular expressions, and word embeddings created from the UMBC corpus. Our system Babbage participated in Subtask 1A for English and placed 6th of 19 systems when identifying concept hypernyms, and 12th of 18 systems for entity hypernyms.', 'ar': 'Hypernym Discovery هي مهمة تحديد hypernyms المحتملة لمصطلح معين. كلمة Hypernym هي كلمة عامة يتم تنسيقها إلى كلمات أكثر تحديدًا. تستكشف هذه الورقة العديد من الأساليب التي تعتمد على التكرار المتزامن لأزواج الكلمات ، وأنماط هيرست القائمة على التعبيرات العادية ، وتضمينات الكلمات التي تم إنشاؤها من مجموعة UMBC. شارك نظامنا Babbage في Subtask 1A للغة الإنجليزية ووضع 6 من 19 نظامًا عند تحديد المفاهيم التشعبية ، و 12 من 18 نظامًا للغة التشعبية للكيان.', 'pt': 'Hypernym Discovery é a tarefa de identificar potenciais hiperônimos para um determinado termo. Um hiperônimo é uma palavra mais generalizada que é superordenada a palavras mais específicas. Este artigo explora várias abordagens que se baseiam em frequências de co-ocorrência de pares de palavras, padrões de Hearst baseados em expressões regulares e embeddings de palavras criados a partir do corpus UMBC. Nosso sistema Babbage participou da Subtarefa 1A para inglês e ficou em 6º de 19 sistemas ao identificar hiperônimos de conceito e 12º de 18 sistemas para hiperônimos de entidade.', 'es': 'Hypernym Discovery es la tarea de identificar posibles hiperónimos para un término determinado. Un hiperónimo es una palabra más generalizada que supera a palabras más específicas. Este artículo explora varios enfoques que se basan en las frecuencias de coocurrencia de pares de palabras, los patrones de Hearst basados en expresiones regulares y las incrustaciones de palabras creadas a partir del corpus de UMBC. Nuestro sistema Babbage participó en la subtarea 1A para inglés y ocupó el sexto lugar de 19 sistemas al identificar hiperónimos conceptuales, y el duodécimo de 18 sistemas para hiperónimos de entidades.', 'fr': "Hypernym Discovery est la tâche d'identifier les hyperonymes potentiels pour un terme donné. Un hyperonyme est un mot plus généralisé qui est surordonné à des mots plus spécifiques. Cet article explore plusieurs approches qui s'appuient sur les fréquences de co-occurrence de paires de mots, les modèles Hearst basés sur des expressions régulières et les intégrations de mots créées à partir du corpus UMBC. Notre système Babbage a participé à la sous-tâche 1A pour l'anglais et s'est classé 6ème sur 19 systèmes lors de l'identification des hyperonymes de concept, et 12ème des 18 systèmes pour les hyperonymes d'entités.", 'ja': 'ハイパーニムディスカバリーは、特定の用語の潜在的なハイパーニムを識別するタスクです。ハイパーニムとは、より一般化された単語で、より具体的な単語に優先順位をつけたものです。本稿では、正規表現に基づくワードペア、ハーストパターン、およびUMBCコーパスから作成されたワード埋め込みの共起頻度に依存するいくつかのアプローチを探求する。私たちのシステムBabbageは、英語のSubtask 1 Aに参加し、概念のハイパーニムを識別する際に19のシステムのうち6番目に、エンティティのハイパーニムのための18のシステムのうち12番目に位置付けられました。', 'zh': '超名知给定术语之在超名也。 超名词是一更广义的词,与更词更相调。 本文讨数赖于词对共现频率、基于正则表达式赫斯特模式及 UMBC 语料库所创词嵌之法。 吾之Babbage与英语子1A,识其名而在19统之中,在6位,在体超义词之18在第12位。', 'hi': 'हाइपरनिम डिस्कवरी किसी दिए गए शब्द के लिए संभावित हाइपरनिम्स की पहचान करने का कार्य है। एक हाइपरनिम एक अधिक सामान्यीकृत शब्द है जो अधिक विशिष्ट शब्दों के लिए सुपर-ऑर्डिनेट है। यह पेपर कई दृष्टिकोणों की पड़ताल करता है जो शब्द जोड़े की सह-घटना आवृत्तियों पर भरोसा करते हैं, नियमित अभिव्यक्तियों के आधार पर हर्स्ट पैटर्न, और यूएमबीसी कॉर्पस से बनाए गए शब्द एम्बेडिंग। हमारे सिस्टम बैबेज ने अंग्रेजी के लिए सबटास्क 1 ए में भाग लिया और अवधारणा हाइपरनिम्स की पहचान करते समय 19 प्रणालियों में से 6 वें स्थान पर रखा, और इकाई हाइपरनिम्स के लिए 18 प्रणालियों में से 12 वें स्थान पर रखा।', 'ru': 'Hypernym Discovery - задача выявления потенциальных гипернимов для данного термина. Гиперним - это более обобщенное слово, которое имеет супер-ординацию с более конкретными словами. В этой статье исследуется несколько подходов, которые основаны на частоте совместного встречаемости пар слов, шаблонов Херста, основанных на регулярных выражениях, и вложений слов, созданных из корпуса UMBC. Наша система Babbage участвовала в подзадаче 1A для английского языка и разместила 6-ю из 19 систем при идентификации концептуальных гипернимов, и 12-ю из 18 систем для гипернимов сущностей.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le Fionnachtain Hipirnimh ná hipearainmneacha féideartha a aithint do théarma ar leith. Focal níos ginearálaithe is ea hipearainm a sháraíonn focail níos sainiúla. Scrúdaíonn an páipéar seo roinnt cur chuige a bhraitheann ar mhinicíochtaí comhtharlaitheacha de phéirí focal, ar Phatrúin Hearst bunaithe ar nathanna rialta, agus ar leabú focal a cruthaíodh ó chorpas UMBC. Ghlac ár gcóras Babbage páirt i bhFothasc 1A don Bhéarla agus chuir sé sa 6ú háit de 19 gcóras nuair a bhí hipearainmneacha coincheapa á n-aithint, agus sa 12ú de 18 córas le haghaidh hipearainmneacha eintitis.', 'ka': 'ჰიპერნიმური განახლება არის პოტენციალური ჰიპერნიმური განახლების რაოდენობა. ჰიპერნიმი არის უფრო გენერალური სიტყვა, რომელიც სუპეროდენტური სიტყვას. ეს დოკუმენტი განსხვავებს რამდენიმე დახმარება, რომელიც მხოლოდ დახმარებული სიტყვების ფერიკუმენტებზე, სიტყვების ფერიკუმენტებზე, სიტყვების ფერიკუმენტებზე, რომელიც რე ჩვენი სისტემა Babbage იყო ინგლისური სამუშაო 1A-ში და 19 სისტემაში 6ი დაყენება, როდესაც კონცექტის ჰიპერნიმების განსაზღვრება და 18 სისტემების 12ი ჰიპერნიმებისთვის.', 'el': 'Η ανακάλυψη υπερνύμων είναι το καθήκον του εντοπισμού πιθανών υπερνύμων για έναν δεδομένο όρο. Ένα υπερνύμιο είναι μια πιο γενικευμένη λέξη που είναι ανώτερη σε πιο συγκεκριμένες λέξεις. Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά διάφορες προσεγγίσεις που βασίζονται σε συχνότητες συνεμφάνισης ζευγαριών λέξεων, μοτίβα που βασίζονται σε κανονικές εκφράσεις και ενσωμάτωση λέξεων που δημιουργούνται από το σώμα του UMBC. Το σύστημά μας συμμετείχε στην Υποεργασία 1A για τα Αγγλικά και τοποθετήθηκε 6α από 19 συστήματα για τον προσδιορισμό εννοιών υπερνύμων, και 12α από 18α συστήματα για τα υπερνύματα οντότητας.', 'hu': 'A Hypernym Discovery feladata egy adott kifejezés potenciális hypernymeinek azonosítása. A hiperním egy általánosítottabb szó, amely szuper-koordinátája a konkrétabb szavaknak. A tanulmány számos olyan megközelítést vizsgál, amelyek a szópárok egyidejű előfordulási gyakoriságára, a reguláris kifejezéseken alapuló Hearst mintákra és az UMBC korpuszból létrehozott szóbeágyazásokra támaszkodnak. Rendszerünk Babbage részt vett az 1A. alfeladatban angol nyelven, és 19 rendszer közül 6. helyezett a fogalmi hipernímek azonosításában, 18 rendszerből pedig 12. helyezett az entitás hipernímek közül.', 'mk': 'Хипернимско откритие е задачата за идентификување на потенцијалните хиперними за одреден термин. Хипернимот е погенерализиран збор кој е супер-ординиран со поспецифични зборови. Оваа хартија истражува неколку пристапи кои се потпираат на фреквенции на соопштеност на зборови парови, Hearst Patterns базирани на регуларни изрази и зборови вградени од UMBC корпусот. Нашиот систем Бабејџ учествуваше во Subtask 1A за англиски и постави 6 од 19 системи кога идентификуваше концепт хиперними, и 12 од 18 системи за хиперними на ентитетите.', 'lt': 'Hipernimo atradimas yra užduotis nustatyti galimus hipernimus tam tikru terminu. Hipnimas yra labiau generalizuotas žodis, kuris yra superordinuotas konkretesniems žodžiams. Šiame dokumente nagrinėjami keli metodai, grindžiami žodžių poros, širdies šablonų, grindžiamų reguliariais išraiškais, ir žodžių įterpimo dažniais, sukurtais iš UMBC korpus. Mūsų sistema Babbage dalyvavo 1A subužduotyje anglų kalba ir nustatydama koncepcinius hiperinimus padėjo 6-ąją iš 19 sistemų ir 12-ąją iš 18 sistemų subjektų hiperinimams.', 'it': "Hypernym Discovery è il compito di identificare potenziali ipernimi per un dato termine. Un ipernimo è una parola più generalizzata che è super-ordinata a parole più specifiche. Questo articolo esplora diversi approcci che si basano sulle frequenze di co-occorrenza di coppie di parole, modelli Hearst basati su espressioni regolari e incorporazioni di parole create dal corpus UMBC. Il nostro sistema Babbage ha partecipato al Subtask 1A per l'inglese e si è piazzato 6° su 19 sistemi nell'identificazione degli ipernimi concettuali e 12° su 18 sistemi per gli ipernimi entità.", 'ms': 'Penyelidikan Hipernim adalah tugas untuk mengenalpasti hipernim potensi untuk term a tertentu. Hypernim adalah perkataan yang lebih umum yang super-koordinat kepada perkataan yang lebih spesifik. Kertas ini mengeksplorasi beberapa pendekatan yang bergantung pada frekuensi sambungan pasangan perkataan, Corak Hearst berdasarkan ungkapan biasa, dan pelengkapan perkataan yang dicipta dari korpus UMBC. Sistem kami Babbage berpartisipasi dalam Subtask 1A untuk bahasa Inggeris dan ditempatkan ke-6 daripada 19 sistem apabila mengenalpasti konsep hypernym, dan ke-12 daripada 18 sistem untuk entity hypernym.', 'ml': 'ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിമ ഡിസ്ക്വറി ഒരു നിശ്ചിത അവധിയ്ക്കുള്ള സാധ്യതകള്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിമം തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള ജോലി ഒരു ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനൈമാണ് കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ളത്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് സംഭവിക്കുന്ന ചില വഴികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇണകളുടെ ഇണകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. ഹാര്\u200dസ്റ്റ് പാറ്റര്\u200dന്\u200dസ ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ബാബ്ബാജ് സബ്ബ്ബജ് 1A-ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. 19 സിസ്റ്റത്തിലെ ആറാം സിസ്റ്', 'no': 'Hypernymoppdaging er oppgåva for å identifisera potensielle hypernymar for eit gitt uttrykk. Ein hypernim er ein mer generelt ord som er super-orden til meir spesifikke ord. Denne papiret utforskar fleire tilnærmingar som dependerer på samtidige frekvenser av ordpar, hjerstmønsterer basert på regulære uttrykk, og ordinnbygging laga frå UMBC-korpusen. Sistemet Babbage deltok i Subtask 1A for engelsk og plassert 6. av 19 systemer når det identifiserer konsepthypernymar, og 12. av 18 system for entitetshypernymar.', 'kk': 'Hypernym Discovery - келтірілген терминдің потенциал гипернимдерін анықтау тапсырмасы. Хиперним - көптеген сөздерге көптеген әдеттегі сөз. Бұл қағаз бірнеше жағдайларды зерттейді. Бұл сөздің екі жиіліктеріне тәуелді, Hearst үлгі өрнектеріне негізделген, және UMBC корпусынан құрылған сөздерді ендіру. Біздің жүйеміздің Babbage 1A Subtask үшін ағылшын тіліне қатысу жүйесіне қатысу жүйесі болды. 19 жүйелердің 6- ші ретінде гипернимдерді анықтап, 18 жүйелердің 12- ші ретінде гипернимдерді анықтағанда ор', 'ro': 'Hypernym Discovery este sarcina de a identifica potențiale hipernime pentru un anumit termen. Un hipernim este un cuvânt mai generalizat care este super-ordonat la cuvinte mai specifice. Această lucrare explorează mai multe abordări care se bazează pe frecvențele de coerență ale perechilor de cuvinte, modelele Hearst bazate pe expresii regulate și încorporările de cuvinte create din corpul UMBC. Sistemul nostru Babbage a participat la Subsarcina 1A pentru limba engleză și a plasat al 6-lea din 19 sisteme la identificarea hipernimelor conceptuale și al 12-lea din 18 sisteme pentru hipernimele entităților.', 'mt': 'L-Iskopri ta’ Ipernim huwa l-kompitu li jiġu identifikati iperinimi potenzjali għal terminu partikolari. Ipernima hija kelma aktar ġeneralizzata li hija superordinata għal kliem aktar speċifiku. Dan id-dokument jesplora diversi approċċi li jiddependu fuq frekwenzi ta’ kookkorrenza ta’ pari ta’ kliem, Patterni tal-Ħoss ibbażati fuq espressjonijiet regolari, u inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem maħluqa mill-UMBC corpus. Is-sistema tagħna Babbage ipparteċipat fis-Subkompitu 1A għall-Ingliż u poġġiet is-sitt minn 19-il sistema meta identifikat kunċett iperinimi, u t-tnax minn 18-il sistema għall-iperinimi tal-entità.', 'sr': 'Hypernim Discovery je zadatak identifikacije potencijalnih hipernima za određeni termin. Hipernim je generalizovanija reč koja je super-uredna na specifičnije reči. Ovaj papir istražuje nekoliko pristupa koji se oslanjaju na frekvenciju saradnje reči par, Hearst Patterns bazirane na redovnim izrazima, i reči ugrađene iz UMBC korpusa. Naš sistem Babbage je sudjelovao u podzadatku 1A za engleski i stavio 6. od 19 sistema kada je identifikovao koncept hipernima, i 12. od 18 sistema za hipernima entiteta.', 'mn': 'Хиперним Дисковри гэдэг нь тодорхойлогдсон терминд боломжтой гиперним гэдгийг тодорхойлж чадна. Хиперним бол илүү ерөнхийлөгч үг юм. Энэ нь илүү тодорхой үгсийн төлөвлөгөөтэй. Энэ цаас хэд хэдэн арга барилгуудыг судалж байна. Энэ нь UMBC корпус-аас бүтээсэн хэдэн арга барилгууд, Hearst Patterns-г ихэвчлэн илэрхийлэл дээр байдаг. Бидний систем Babbage Англи хэл дээр 1A Subtask-д оролцсон бөгөөд 19 системийн 6-т гиперним гэдгийг мэдэхэд оролцсон бөгөөд 18 системийн 12-т гиперним гэдгийг мэдэхэд оролцсон.', 'pl': 'Hypernim Discovery to zadanie identyfikacji potencjalnych hipernimów dla danego terminu. Hipernim to bardziej uogólnione słowo, które jest nadrzędne do bardziej konkretnych słów. W artykule przeanalizowano kilka podejść polegających na częstotliwości współwystępowania par słów, Hearst Patterns opartych na wyrażeniach regularnych oraz osadzeniach słów utworzonych z korpusu UMBC. Nasz system Babbage uczestniczył w Podzadaniu 1A dla języka angielskiego i umieścił szósty z 19 systemów przy identyfikacji hipernimów koncepcyjnych, a 12-ty z 18-tych systemów dla hipernimów jednostek.', 'si': 'හායිපර්නිම් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් හායිපර්නිම් විදිහට දෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන වැඩ හායිපර්නිම් එකක් තව සාමාන්\u200dය වචනයක් වඩා විශේෂ වචනයක්. මේ පත්තර පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වචන සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාසයේ වචන සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා වචන සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාසය, හිර අපේ පද්ධතිය Babbage එක්ක ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාව සබ්ටැක්ස් 1A වලට පාලනය කරලා ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාව සඳහා පද්ධතිය 19ක් 6වෙනි පද්ධතිය හායිපර්', 'so': 'Dalbashada Hypernym waa shaqada aqoonsashada hiwaayadaha suurtagalka ah waqti la ballamay. Hadal dheeraad ah waa hadal caadi ah oo aad u caadi ah erayo gaar ah. Qoraalkan wuxuu baaraandegaa qaabab badan oo ku saabsan isbedelka labada labo, Hearst Patterns ku saleysan expressions joogtada ah, iyo eray embeddings ah oo ka abuuray UMBC corpus. Systemada Babbage waxay ka qeybqaaday Subtask 1A ee ingiriisiga, wuxuuna dhigay 6aad oo ka mid ah 19 nidaam marka ay aqoonsato fikrada hypernyms, iyo 12aad oo ka mid ah 18 nidaam tijaabada.', 'ta': 'ஹைப்பர்னிம் கண்டுபிடிப்பு குறிப்பிட்ட காலத்திற்கு சாத்தியமான மின்னெழுத்துக்களை கண்டறியும்  A hypernym is a more generalized word that is super-ordinate to more specific words. இந்த தாள் சில வழிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் சொல்லு ஜோடியின் இணைய நிகழ்வுகளை சார்ந்து, வழக்கமான வார்த்தைகளை அடிப்படையில் குறிப்பிட்ட சொல எங்கள் கணினியின் பாப்பெக் ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு உப செயல் 1A பகிர்ந்தது மற்றும் 19 கணினிகளில் 6வது அமைப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் போது, 18 முறைமை', 'sv': 'Hypernym Discovery är uppgiften att identifiera potentiella hypernymer för en given term. En hypernym är ett mer generaliserat ord som är superkoordinerat till mer specifika ord. Denna uppsats utforskar flera tillvägagångssätt som bygger på samtidig förekomst frekvens av ordpar, Hearst Patterns baserade på reguljära uttryck och ordinbäddningar skapade från UMBC-korpusen. Vårt system Babbage deltog i Subtask 1A för engelska och placerade 6:e av 19 system vid identifiering av koncepthypernymer och 12:e av 18 system för entitetshypernymer.', 'ur': 'Hypernym Discovery is the task of identifying potential hypernyms for a given term. ایک ہیرنیم ایک زیادہ عمومی کلم ہے جو زیادہ مشخص کلمات کے لئے زیادہ مقرر ہے. This paper explores several approaches that rely on co-occurrence frequencies of words pairs, Hearst Patterns based on regular expressions, and word embeddings created from the UMBC corpus. ہماری سیستم Babbage نے انگلیسی کے لئے Subtask 1A میں شریک کیا اور 19 سیستم میں 6th کو ڈال دیا جب سمجھ hipernyms کو پہچان لیتے تھے اور 18 سیستم میں 12th entity hypernyms کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Hypernym Discovery is the potential hypernyms identification of a given term. Hyperym - ko'proq maxsus so'zlar uchun juda oddiy so'z. This paper explores several approaches that rely on co-occurrence frequencies of word pairs, Hearst Patterns based on regular expressions, and word embeddings created from the UMBC corpus.  Bizning tizimimizning Babbage ingliz vazifasi 1A uchun qidirilgan va 19 tizimdagi 6chi tizimni aniqlashda, va 18 tizimning 12 chi va birinchi qismi hypernym uchun.", 'vi': 'Khám phá Hypernym là nhiệm vụ xác định các siêu tốc tiềm năng trong một thuật ngữ cụ thể. Một siêu nam giới là một từ phổ biến hơn. Nó cực kỳ phù hợp với các từ cụ thể hơn. Tờ giấy này tìm kiếm các phương pháp dựa trên tần số lần gặp đồng của các cặp từ, Các biểu mẫu Hearst dựa trên biểu thức chính quy, và sự tác nhân từ từ UMBC. Hệ thống mà Babbage tham gia vào Sub ask 1A for English and placed 6t of 19 systems when identification nhào hyperdonys, and 12th of 18 systems for Thực thể hypnyms.', 'nl': 'Hypernym Discovery is de taak om potentiële hyperniemen voor een bepaalde term te identificeren. Een hyperniem is een meer algemeen woord dat superordinaat is aan meer specifieke woorden. Dit artikel onderzoekt verschillende benaderingen die afhankelijk zijn van co-voorkomen frequenties van woordparen, Hearst Patterns gebaseerd op reguliere expressies en woord embeddings gemaakt uit het UMBC corpus. Ons systeem Babbage nam deel aan Subtask 1A voor Engels en plaatste 6e van 19 systemen bij het identificeren van concepthyperniemen, en 12e van 18 systemen voor entiteitshyperniemen.', 'bg': 'Откриването на хиперними е задачата за идентифициране на потенциални хиперними за даден термин. Хипернимът е по-обобщена дума, която е супер-ординатна към по-специфични думи. Настоящата статия изследва няколко подхода, които разчитат на честотите на съвместно срещане на двойки думи, Харстови модели, базирани на регулярни изрази, и вграждания на думи, създадени от корпуса. Нашата система участва в Подзадача 1A за английски език и поставя 6-та от 19 системи при идентифициране на концептуални хиперними и 12-та от 18 системи за хиперними на entiтети.', 'da': 'Hypernym Discovery er opgaven at identificere potentielle hypernymer for et givet udtryk. Et hypernym er et mere generaliseret ord, der er super-koordineret til mere specifikke ord. Denne artikel udforsker flere tilgange, der er afhængige af frekvenser af samtidig forekomst af ordpar, Hearst mønstre baseret på regulære udtryk og ord indlejringer skabt fra UMBC korpus. Vores system Babbage deltog i Subtask 1A for English og placerede 6. ud af 19 systemer til identificering af begreb hypernymer, og 12. ud af 18 systemer til entitetshypernymer.', 'hr': 'Hypernym Discovery je zadatak identifikacije potencijalnih hipernima za određeni termin. Hipernim je generaliziranija riječ koja je super-uredna na određene riječi. Ovaj papir istražuje nekoliko pristupa koji se oslanjaju na frekvenciju saradnje riječi par, Hearst Patterns na temelju redovnih izraza, i priključenja riječi koje su stvorene iz UMBC korpusa. Naš sustav Babbage sudjelovao je u podzadatku 1A za engleski i stavio 6. od 19 sustava kada je identificirao koncept hipernima, i 12. od 18 sustava za hipernima entitata.', 'ko': '초음어가 발견되는 임무는 주어진 용어의 잠재적인 초음어를 식별하는 것이다.초의어는 더욱 넓은 의미의 단어로, 더욱 구체적인 단어와 슈퍼 좌표이다.본고는 몇 가지 의존어가 공현 주파수, 정규 표현식을 바탕으로 하는 헤스터 모델과 UMBC 어료 라이브러리에서 만든 단어를 삽입하는 방법을 연구했다.우리 시스템 바베치는 영어의 하위 퀘스트 1A에 참여해 개념 초어를 식별하는 19개 시스템 중 6위, 실체 초어를 식별하는 18개 시스템 중 12위를 차지했다.', 'id': 'Hypernym Discovery adalah tugas untuk mengidentifikasi hipernim potensial untuk istilah tertentu. Sebuah hipernim adalah kata yang lebih umum yang super-koordinat untuk kata-kata yang lebih spesifik. Kertas ini mengeksplorasi beberapa pendekatan yang bergantung pada frekuensi korespondensi pasangan kata, Hearst Patterns berdasarkan ekspresi biasa, dan pembangunan kata yang diciptakan dari UMBC corpus. Sistem kami Babbage berpartisipasi di Subtask 1A untuk bahasa Inggris dan menempatkan sistem ke-6 dari 19 ketika mengidentifikasi konsep hypernym, dan ke-12 dari 18 sistem untuk entity hypernym.', 'de': 'Hypernym Discovery ist die Aufgabe, potenzielle Hypernyme für einen bestimmten Begriff zu identifizieren. Ein Hypernym ist ein allgemeineres Wort, das zu spezifischeren Wörtern übergeordnet ist. Dieser Beitrag untersucht verschiedene Ansätze, die auf Ko-Vorkommen-Frequenzen von Wortpaaren, Hearst-Mustern basierend auf regulären Ausdrücken und Worteinbettungen basieren, die aus dem UMBC-Korpus erstellt wurden. Unser System Babbage nahm an Subtask 1A für Englisch teil und platzierte sechste von 19-Systemen bei der Identifizierung von Konzepthypernymen und zwölfte von 18-Systemen für Entitätshypernyme.', 'sw': 'Ugunduzi wa Hypernym ni jukumu la kutambua uwezekano wa umeme kwa muda maalumu. Utangazaji ni neno linalojumuisha zaidi ambalo ni la kawaida kwa maneno maalum. Makala hii inatafuta mbinu kadhaa zinazotegemea viwango vinavyotokea kwa pamoja na wanandoa wa maneno, Wazalendo wa Nyooka kwa kutumia maoni ya mara kwa mara, na maneno yaliyotengenezwa kutoka kwenye makampuni ya UMBC. Mfumo wetu wa Babbage walishiriki katika kazi ya Uingereza 1A na kuweka mifumo ya 6 ya 19 wakati wa kutambua dhana ya juu, na mifumo ya 12 ya 18 kwa ajili ya vifaa vya habari.', 'fa': 'هوپر نیم دیسکوری کار شناسایی هوپر نیم\u200cهای پتانسیل برای یک مدت معین است. یک هیپرنیم یک کلمه عمومی بیشتری است که به کلمات خاص بیشتری قانون است. این کاغذ تعدادی از طریق\u200cها را تحقیق می\u200cکند که بر فرانسوی\u200cهای همکاری از جفت\u200cهای کلمه، نمونه\u200cهای Hearst بر اساس تعریف\u200cهای معمولی، و استفاده\u200cهای کلمه\u200cای که از کورپوس UMBC ایجاد شده\u200cاند استفاده می\u200cکند. سیستم ما Babbage در Subtask 1A برای انگلیسی شرکت کرد و ۶م از ۱۹ سیستم را در زمان شناسایی مفهوم هیپرنیم قرار داد و ۱۲م از ۱۸ سیستم برای هیپرنیم\u200cها.', 'tr': 'Hipernim tapylygy berilen termyn üçin potensial hipernymlary tanamak täblisidir. Hipernim has beýleki sözlere süper-ordenan bir sözdir. Bu kağıt, UMBC korpusundan oluşturyan kelime çift frekanslarına dayanan birçok yaklaşımları keşfetýär. Biziň sistemamyz Babbagyň 1A Subtask üçin iňlis dilinde goşuldy we 19 sistemalaryň 6-nji sistemasyna hipernymlary tanyşdyryp wagtynda, we 18 sistemalaryň 12-nji sistemasyna hipernymlar bardyr.', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i hipernimeve është detyra e identifikimit të hipernimeve të mundshme për një term të caktuar. Një hipernim është një fjalë më e gjeneralizuar që është super-koordinuar me fjalë më specifike. Ky dokument eksploron disa metoda që mbështeten në frekuencat e bashkëpunimit të palëve të fjalëve, Patronat e Zemrës bazuar në shprehjet e rregullta dhe përfshirjet e fjalëve të krijuara nga korpusi UMBC. Sistemi ynë Babbage mori pjesë në Subtask 1A për anglisht dhe vendosi të gjashtën nga 19 sisteme kur identifikoi konceptin e hipernimeve dhe të dymbëdhjetën nga 18 sisteme për njësinë e hipernimeve.', 'hy': "Հիպերնիմ Բացահայտությունը նշանակում է հնարավոր հիպերնիմներ բացահայտել որոշ տերմինների համար: Հիպերնիմը ավելի ընդհանուր բառ է, որը ավելի կոնկրետ բառերի հետ կապված է: Այս հոդվածը ուսումնասիրում է մի քանի մոտեցումներ, որոնք հիմնված են բառերի զույգերի հաճախականություններին, Սրտի կաղապարների հաճախականություններին, հիմնված սովորական արտահայտումների վրա, և բառերի ներդրումների վրա, որոնք ստեղծվել են ԱՄԲԿ կորպուսից: Մեր համակարգը Բեբեյջը մասնակցել է անգլերենի 1A ենթախնդրի մեջ և տեղադրել է 19 համակարգերից 6-րդը' հայտնաբերելով հիպերնիմները, և էության հիպերնիմների 18-րդը:", 'af': "Hypernym Ontdekking is die taak van identifiseer potensiele hipernies vir 'n gegewe term. 'n Hypernym is 'n meer generaliseerde woord wat is super-ordenaat na meer spesifieke woorde. Hierdie papier ondersoek verskeie toegange wat vertrou op koevekensiefrekwensies van woorde paar, Hearst Patrone gebaseer op gewone uitdrukkings, en woord inbêdings geskep van die UMBC corpus. Ons stelsel Babbage het gedeel in Subtask 1A vir Engels en 6de van 19 stelsels gesit wanneer koncepte hypernyme identifiseer, en 12de van 18 stelsels vir entiteit hypernyme identifiseer.", 'am': 'Hypernym Discovery is the task of identifying the potential hypernyms for a given time. የhypernym ቃላት በተለያዩ ቃላት ላይ የተመሳሳይ ነው፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም በሙሉ ኮርፓስ የተፈጠረውን የንግግር ግንኙነት እና ቃላትን በሙሉ ቁጥር የሚታመሙ ብዙዎች የሚደረጉትን ደረጃዎች ይፈልጋል፡፡ የፖስቲካችን ባብጅ አዲስ ጉዳይ 1A ለመንግልዝኛ ተጋድሞ የ19 ስርዓቶች 6ኛ እና የ18 ስርዓቶች አፍሬኒምን ለማግኘት ስርዓት አቀረበ፡፡', 'az': 'Hypernim Discovery, müəyyən edilmiş müddət üçün potensial hipernimləri tanıma görevi. Hipernim daha layiq sözlərə çox layiqdir. Bu kağıt bir neçə tərəflər keşif edir ki, birlikdə olan söz cütlərinin, sıradan ifadələrə dayanan Hearst Modellərin və UMBC korpusundan yaratdığı söz inşallarına təvəkkül edir. Sistemimiz Babbage İngilizce üçün Subtask 1A-də yer aldı və 19 sistemlərin 6-ində hipernimləri tanıdığında, 18 sistemlərin 12-ində hipernimləri tanıdırdı.', 'bn': 'হাইপার্নিম ডিস্কোরি একটি নির্দিষ্ট মেয়াদের জন্য সম্ভাব্য হাইপারেনিম চিহ্নিত করার কাজ। একটি হাইপারেনিম হচ্ছে আরো সাধারণ শব্দ যা আরো নির্দিষ্ট শব্দের জন্য অত্যন্ত স্বাভাবিক। এই পত্রিকা বেশ কয়েকটি উপায় খুঁজে বের করেছে যারা শব্দ জোড়ার সাথে বিশ্বাস করে, হার্স্ট প্যাটার্ন নিয়মিত প্রকাশের ভিত্তিতে এবং উএমসি কর্ আমাদের সিস্টেম ব্যাব্যাগ ইংরেজিতে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে এবং ১৯টি সিস্টেমের ৬তম ব্যবস্থা দিয়েছে যখন ধারণা হাইপারেনিম চিহ্নিত করা হয় এবং ১৮ স', 'ca': "L'Hipernim Discovery és la tasca d'identificar hipernims potencials per un terme determinat. Un hipernim és una paraula més generalitzada que és superordinada a paraules més específiques. Aquest paper explora diversos enfocaments que es basan en freqüències de coincidència de parelles de paraules, Patrons del Cor basats en expressions regulars i incorporacions de paraules creades del corpus UMBC. El nostre sistema Babbage va participar en la Subtasca 1A per anglès i va posar la sexta de 19 sistemes al identificar hipernims conceptuals, i la 12ª de 18 sistemes per hipernims d'entitats.", 'bs': 'Hypernim Discovery je zadatak identifikacije potencijalnih hipernima za određeni termin. Hipernim je generaliziranija riječ koja je super-uredna na određene riječi. Ovaj papir istražuje nekoliko pristupa koji se oslanjaju na frekvenciju saradnje riječi par, Hearst Patterns bazirane na redovnim izrazima, i uvođenja riječi koje su stvorene iz UMBC korpusa. Naš sistem Babbage sudjelovao je u podzadatku 1A za engleski i stavio 6. od 19 sustava kada je identificirao koncept hipernima, i 12. od 18 sustava za hipernimu entiteta.', 'cs': 'Hypernym Discovery je úkolem identifikovat potenciální hypernymy pro daný termín. Hypernym je obecnější slovo, které je nadřazeno konkrétnějším slovům. Tento článek zkoumá několik přístupů, které spoléhají na frekvenci současného výskytu slovních párů, Hearst vzorce založené na regulárních výrazech a slovní vložení vytvořené z korpusu UMBC. Náš systém Babbage se podílel na Subtasku 1A pro angličtinu a umístil šestý z 19 systémů při identifikaci koncepčních hypernymů a dvanáctý z 18 systémů pro entity hypernymy.', 'et': 'Hüpernüümide avastamine on ülesanne tuvastada konkreetse termini potentsiaalsed hüpernüümid. Hüpernüüm on üldisem sõna, mis on ülikoordinaarne konkreetsemate sõnadega. Käesolevas artiklis uuritakse mitmeid lähenemisviise, mis tuginevad sõnavarade koosesinemissagedustele, regulaaravaldistel põhinevatele Hearsti mustritele ja UMBC korpusest loodud sõnade manustamisele. Meie süsteem Babbage osales inglise keele alamülesandes 1A ja paigutas kontseptsiooni hüpernüümide tuvastamisel kuuendaks 19 süsteemist ja üksuse hüpernüümide tuvastamisel kaheteistkümnendaks 18 süsteemist.', 'fi': 'Hypernyymien löytäminen on tehtävä tunnistaa mahdolliset hypernyymit tietylle termille. Hypernyymi on yleisempi sana, joka on superordinaatti tarkempiin sanoihin. Tässä artikkelissa tarkastellaan useita lähestymistapoja, jotka perustuvat sanaparien samanaikaiseen esiintymistiheyteen, säännöllisiin lausekkeisiin perustuviin Hearst Patterns -malleihin ja UMBC-korpusesta luotuihin sanaupotuksiin. Järjestelmämme Babbage osallistui englanninkieliseen alatehtävään 1A ja sijoittui kuudenneksi 19 järjestelmästä käsitehypernyymien tunnistamisessa ja kahdestoiksi 18 järjestelmästä entiteettihypernyymien tunnistamisessa.', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Perintah awak dhéwé, pernik awak dhéwé kuwi nyang-uwis kuwi super-ordinate kanggo awak dhéwé. Perintah sing nggawe akeh akeh operas sing sampeyan mrambah dumateng kapan pangan kelas, tapun paran sing dumateng akhar abasane mrambah dumateng, lan word embedding shadow Sistem babbage nambah kang Subtask 1A kanggo ingkang sampeyan 6 sampeyan ning 19 sistem sing dadi nggawe sistem sistem sing permanis, lan 12 sampeyan 18 sistem kejahatan sistem sing permanis', 'ha': "Hipernym Wani surernym yana da wata kalma mai jumla da shi, wanda ya fi-ordina zuwa wasu kalmõmi masu ƙayyade. Wannan takardar ta neman wasu hanyõyi waɗanda ke dõgara a kan co-inci rates of words, Heart Aborters based on magana normal, da word embeddings wanda aka halitta daga nau'in UMC. Babbage na kammala kanmu ya yi shirin sub-aikin 1A wa Ingiriya kuma ya sanya 6 na'urar 19 idan yana gane zato-Hyernyms, da 12th na'urar 18 na'urar wa abubuwa na Hyernyms.", 'sk': 'Odkrivanje hipernimov je naloga identifikacije potencialnih hipernimov za določen izraz. Hipernim je bolj posplošena beseda, ki je super-ordinatirana na bolj specifične besede. Ta prispevek raziskuje več pristopov, ki se opirajo na frekvenco soočanja besednih parov, Hearstovih vzorcev, ki temeljijo na rednih izrazih, in besedne vdelave, ustvarjene iz korpusa UMBC. Naš sistem Babbage je sodeloval v podnalogi 1A za angleščino in uvrstil 6. od 19 sistemov pri identifikaciji konceptnih hipernimov in 12. od 18 sistemov pri hipernimih entitet.', 'he': 'גילוי היפרנים הוא המשימה לזהות היפרנימות פוטנציאליות למונח מסוים. היפרנים היא מילה יותר כללית שהיא סופר-אוורדיינת למילים יותר ספציפיות. הנייר הזה חוקר מספר גישות שמסומכות על תדירות התרחשות יחד של זוגות מילים, דפוסי הלב המבוססים על ביטויים רגילים, והקיצוב מילים שנוצר מהקורפוס UMBC. המערכת שלנו Babbage השתתף בתפקיד 1A לאנגלית ומקם 6 מתוך 19 מערכות כאשר מזהה רעיון היפרנימות, ו-12 מתוך 18 מערכות היפרנימות היחידות.', 'bo': 'Hypernym Discovery is the task of identifying potential hypernyms for a given term. མཐུན་སྐྱོང་མིང་ནི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་རེད། ཤོག ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་Babbage དེ་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་རིམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་1A ལ་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྲིད། དབྱིན་ཡུལ་གྱི་རིམ་ལུགས་༦པ་ལག་ལ'}
{'en': 'EXPR at SemEval-2018 Task 9 : A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'ar': 'EXPR في SemEval-2018 المهمة 9: نهج مشترك لاكتشاف Hypernym', 'fr': "EXPR au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 9\xa0: Une approche combinée pour la découverte d'hypernym", 'es': 'EXPR en SemEval-2018 Tarea 9: Un enfoque combinado para el descubrimiento de hipernemas', 'pt': 'EXPR na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 9: Uma abordagem combinada para descoberta de hiperônimos', 'ja': 'EXPR at SemEval -2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018 务 9 EXPR:以超名见为法', 'ru': 'EXPR на SemEval-2018 Задача 9: Комбинированный подход к обнаружению гипернима', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2018 कार्य 9 पर EXPR: Hypernym डिस्कवरी के लिए एक संयुक्त दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'EXPR ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 9: Cur Chuige Comhcheangailte d’Fhionnachtain Hipearainm', 'ka': 'EXPR სამუშაო-2018 სამუშაო დავალება 9: ჰიპერნიმის განახლებისთვის კომბინეული დახმარება', 'el': 'Εργασία 9: Μια συνδυασμένη προσέγγιση για την ανακάλυψη υπερνύμων', 'hu': 'EXPR a SemEval-2018 9. feladaton: A Hypernym Discovery kombinált megközelítése', 'it': 'EXPR al SemEval-2018 Task 9: Un approccio combinato per la scoperta di Hypernym', 'lt': 'EXPR per 2018 m. pusmetį 9 užduotis: kombinuotas metodas hipernimų aptikimui', 'kk': 'EXPR at semiEval-2018 Task 9: a Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'mk': 'EXPR на SemEval-2018 задача 9: Комбиниран пристап за откривање на хиперними', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 9-ല്\u200d എക്സ്പിരി: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിം ഡിസ്ക്വോരിക്കുവാനുള്ള ഒരു കോമിനിഡ് അപ്പോര്\u200dച്ച്', 'mt': 'EXPR f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 9: Approċċ Magħqud għall-Iskopri ta’ Ipernimi', 'no': 'EXPR ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 9: Eit kombinert tilgang for hypernymoppdaging', 'mn': 'EXPR at SemEval-2018 Task 9: A combined approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'pl': 'EXPR na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 9: Połączone podejście do wykrywania hipernimów', 'sr': 'EXPR na semiEval-2018 Task 9: Kombinirani pristup za hipernim otkrivanjem', 'ms': 'EXPR pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 9: Pendekatan Bergabung untuk Penemuan Hipernim', 'so': 'EXPR at SemEval-2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'ro': 'EXPR la SemEval-2018 Task 9: O abordare combinată pentru descoperirea hipernimului', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'EXPR på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 9: Ett kombinerat tillvägagångssätt för upptäckt av hypernym', 'ur': 'EXPR at SemEval-2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 9- ல் EXPR: ஹைப்பர்னிம் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான ஒரு இணைப்பு சேர்', 'uz': '9 Vazifani SemEval- 2018 bilan EXPR: Hypernym Discovery uchun koʻpaytirish', 'vi': '(CÀI LIP) Tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvol-208: A combination tiếp cận for Hypernym Disco', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Комбиниран подход за откриване на хиперними', 'nl': 'EXPR op SemEval-2018 Taak 9: Een gecombineerde aanpak voor hyperniem ontdekking', 'hr': 'EXPR na semiEval-2018 zadatku 9: Kombinirani pristup otkrivanju hipernima', 'da': 'EXPR på SemEval-2018 Opgave 9: En kombineret tilgang til Hypernym Discovery', 'id': 'EXPR at SemEval-2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'de': 'EXPR auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 9: Ein kombinierter Ansatz zur Hypernym-Entdeckung', 'ko': 'SemEval-2018의 EXPR 퀘스트 9: 초자모어 발견의 조합 방법', 'fa': 'EXPR at SemEval-2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'tr': 'EXPR at SemEval-2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'sw': 'EXPR kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 9: Mtandao wa Kuunganika kwa ajili ya Kumbukumbu ya Hypernym', 'sq': 'EXPR në SemEval-2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'af': "EXPR by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 9: ' n Kombineerde toegang vir Hypernym Ontdekking", 'hy': 'ExpPR-ը 2018 թվականի կիսագնդի 9. հանձնարարում. Հիպերնիմի բացահայտության համակցած մոտեցում', 'az': 'EXPR at SemEval-2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ৯-এ এক্সপিরি: হাইপার্নিম ডিস্কোরির জন্য এক সামান্য যোগাযোগ', 'am': 'ስራ 9:', 'ca': 'EXPR a SemEval-2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery', 'bs': 'EXPR na semiEval-2018 Task 9: Kombinirani pristup za otkrivanje hipernima', 'cs': 'EXPR na SemEval-2018 Úkol 9: Kombinovaný přístup k odhalování hypernymů', 'et': 'EXPR SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 9: kombineeritud lähenemisviis hüpernüümide avastamiseks', 'fi': 'EXPR SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 9: Yhdistetty lähestymistapa hypernyymien löytämiseen', 'jv': 'exppra at semiinval-2008 task 9: A combbined Method for Typernem Disc', 'he': 'EXPR ב SemEval-2018 משימה 9: גישה משותפת לגילוי היפרנים', 'sk': 'EXPR na SemEval-2018 naloga 9: kombiniran pristop za odkrivanje hipernimov', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'EXPR at SemEval-2018 Task 9: A Combined Approach for Hypernym Discovery'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present our proposed system (EXPR) to participate in the hypernym discovery task of SemEval 2018. The task addresses the challenge of discovering hypernym relations from a text corpus. Our proposal is a combined approach of path-based technique and distributional technique. We use dependency parser on a corpus to extract candidate hypernyms and represent their dependency paths as a feature vector. The feature vector is concatenated with a feature vector obtained using Wikipedia pre-trained term embedding model. The concatenated feature vector fits a supervised machine learning method to learn a classifier model. This model is able to classify new candidate hypernyms as hypernym or not. Our system performs well to discover new hypernyms not defined in gold hypernyms.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نظامنا المقترح (EXPR) للمشاركة في مهمة اكتشاف Hypernym في SemEval 2018. تتناول المهمة التحدي المتمثل في اكتشاف علاقات Hypernym من مجموعة نصية. اقتراحنا هو نهج مشترك بين الأسلوب القائم على المسار وتقنية التوزيع. نحن نستخدم محلل التبعية في مجموعة لاستخراج الكلمات التشعبية المرشحة وتمثيل مسارات التبعية الخاصة بهم كمتجه للميزات. متجه الميزة متسلسل مع ناقل خاصية تم الحصول عليه باستخدام نموذج التضمين المصطلح المدربين مسبقًا من Wikipedia. يناسب متجه الميزات المتسلسلة طريقة التعلم الآلي الخاضعة للإشراف لتعلم نموذج المصنف. هذا النموذج قادر على تصنيف الترشيحات الجديدة المرشحة على أنها hypernyms أم لا. يعمل نظامنا بشكل جيد لاكتشاف كلمات تشعبية جديدة غير محددة في تشعبات الذهب.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos nuestro sistema propuesto (EXPR) para participar en la tarea de descubrimiento de hipernimos de SemEval 2018. La tarea aborda el desafío de descubrir relaciones hipernimas a partir de un corpus de texto. Nuestra propuesta es un enfoque combinado de técnica basada en rutas y técnica distributiva. Usamos el analizador de dependencias en un corpus para extraer hiperónimos candidatos y representar sus rutas de dependencia como un vector de características. El vector de características se concatena con un vector de características obtenido utilizando el modelo de incrustación de términos previamente entrenado de Wikipedia. El vector de características concatenado se ajusta a un método de aprendizaje automático supervisado para aprender un modelo de clasificador. Este modelo es capaz de clasificar a los nuevos hiperónimos candidatos como hiperónimos o no. Nuestro sistema funciona bien para descubrir nuevos hiperónimos no definidos en los hiperónimos de oro.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons notre système proposé (EXPR) pour participer à la tâche de découverte d'hypernymes de SemEval 2018. La tâche répond au défi de découvrir les relations hyperonymiques à partir d'un corpus de texte. Notre proposition est une approche combinée de la technique basée sur le chemin et de la technique distributionnelle. Nous utilisons un analyseur de dépendances sur un corpus pour extraire les hyperonymes candidats et représenter leurs chemins de dépendance sous forme de vecteur de caractéristiques. Le vecteur de caractéristiques est concaténé avec un vecteur de caractéristiques obtenu à l'aide du modèle d'intégration de termes pré-entraîné Wikipédia. Le vecteur de caractéristiques concaténé correspond à une méthode d'apprentissage automatique supervisé pour apprendre un modèle de classificateur. Ce modèle est capable de classer les nouveaux hyperonymes candidats en tant qu'hypernym ou non. Notre système fonctionne bien pour découvrir de nouveaux hyperonymes non définis dans les hyperonymes dorés.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos nosso sistema proposto (EXPR) para participar da tarefa de descoberta de hiperônimos do SemEval 2018. A tarefa aborda o desafio de descobrir relações hipernímicas a partir de um corpus de texto. Nossa proposta é uma abordagem combinada de técnica baseada em caminhos e técnica distributiva. Usamos o analisador de dependência em um corpus para extrair hiperônimos candidatos e representar seus caminhos de dependência como um vetor de recursos. O vetor de recursos é concatenado com um vetor de recursos obtido usando o modelo de incorporação de termos pré-treinados da Wikipedia. O vetor de recursos concatenado se ajusta a um método de aprendizado de máquina supervisionado para aprender um modelo de classificador. Este modelo é capaz de classificar novos hiperônimos candidatos como hiperônimos ou não. Nosso sistema funciona bem para descobrir novos hiperônimos não definidos em hiperônimos ouro.', 'zh': '本文引SemEval 2018超名词见任之统(EXPR)。 当事解从文本语料库中得超名词挑战。 臣等之言,盖路径之术,布列之术也。 于语料库上用赖解析器以取选超名词,以示特征向量。 特徵向量与用维基百科预训练者术语嵌模形所得向量接。 联者向量拟合监督式机器学法以学分类。 能以新选超名类为超名或不超名。 吾属良善,见黄金超音号中未定义新超音符。', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2018のハイパーニム発見タスクに参加するための提案されたシステム（ EXPR ）を提示する。タスクは、テキストコーパスからハイパーニム関係を発見するという課題に対処します。私たちの提案は、パスベース技術と分配技術の組み合わせアプローチです。コーパスの依存関係解析器を使用して、候補の超ニームを抽出し、それらの依存関係パスを特徴ベクトルとして表します。特徴ベクトルは、Wikipedia事前にトレーニングされた用語埋め込みモデルを使用して得られた特徴ベクトルと連結される。連結された特徴ベクトルは、分類子モデルを学習するための監視対象機械学習方法に適合する。このモデルは、新しい候補のハイパーニムをハイパーニムとして分類することができます。私たちのシステムは、ゴールドのハイパーニムに定義されていない新しいハイパーニムを発見するためにうまく機能します。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем нашу предлагаемую систему (EXPR) для участия в задаче обнаружения гипернима SemEval 2018. Задача решает задачу обнаружения гипернимовых отношений из текстового корпуса. Наше предложение представляет собой комбинированный подход к технике, основанной на траектории, и технике распределения. Мы используем синтаксический анализатор зависимостей на корпусе для извлечения гипернимов-кандидатов и представления их путей зависимости в виде вектора признаков. Вектор признаков соединяют с вектором признаков, полученным с использованием предварительно обученной модели вложения терминов Википедии. Конкатенация вектора признаков соответствует контролируемому методу машинного обучения для изучения модели классификатора. Эта модель способна классифицировать новые гипернимы-кандидаты как гипернимы или нет. Наша система хорошо работает, чтобы обнаружить новые гипернимы, не определенные в золотых гипернимах.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम SemEval 2018 के हाइपरनिम डिस्कवरी कार्य में भाग लेने के लिए हमारी प्रस्तावित प्रणाली (EXPR) प्रस्तुत करते हैं। कार्य एक पाठ कॉर्पस से hypernym संबंधों की खोज की चुनौती को संबोधित करता है। हमारा प्रस्ताव पथ-आधारित तकनीक और वितरण तकनीक का एक संयुक्त दृष्टिकोण है। हम उम्मीदवार hypernyms निकालने के लिए एक कॉर्पस पर निर्भरता पार्सर का उपयोग करें और एक सुविधा वेक्टर के रूप में उनके निर्भरता पथ का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं। सुविधा वेक्टर को विकिपीडिया पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का उपयोग करके प्राप्त एक फीचर वेक्टर के साथ संयोजित किया गया है। concatenated सुविधा वेक्टर एक क्लासिफायर मॉडल सीखने के लिए एक पर्यवेक्षित मशीन सीखने की विधि फिट बैठता है। यह मॉडल नए उम्मीदवार hypernyms hypernym या नहीं के रूप में वर्गीकृत करने में सक्षम है। हमारा सिस्टम सोने के hypernyms में परिभाषित नहीं नए hypernyms की खोज करने के लिए अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair ár gcóras molta (EXPR) chun páirt a ghlacadh sa tasc fionnachtana hypernym de SemEval 2018. Tugann an tasc aghaidh ar an dúshlán a bhaineann le caidreamh hypernym a fháil amach ó chorpas téacs. Is cur chuige comhcheangailte é ár dtogra de theicníc bunaithe ar chosán agus de theicníc dáileacháin. Bainimid úsáid as parsálaí spleáchais ar chorpas chun hipearainmneacha iarrthóra a bhaint amach agus chun a gcuid cosáin spleáchais a léiriú mar ghné-veicteora. Tá an ghné-veicteora comhchuí le gné-veicteora a fhaightear trí úsáid a bhaint as samhail leabaithe téarma réamh-oilte Vicipéid. Feistíonn an ghné-veicteora comhtháite modh meaisínfhoghlama maoirsithe chun samhail aicmitheora a fhoghlaim. Tá an tsamhail seo in ann hipearainmneacha iarrthóra nua a rangú mar hipearnaim nó nach bhfuil. Feidhmíonn ár gcóras go maith chun hipirneacha nua a fháil amach nach bhfuil sainithe i hipearainmneacha óir.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε το προτεινόμενο σύστημά μας (για να συμμετάσχουμε στο έργο ανακάλυψης υπερνύμων της SemEval 2018. Η εργασία αντιμετωπίζει την πρόκληση της ανακάλυψης σχέσεων υπερνύμων από ένα σώμα κειμένου. Η πρότασή μας είναι μια συνδυασμένη προσέγγιση της τεχνικής διαδρομής και της τεχνικής διανομής. Χρησιμοποιούμε αναλυτή εξάρτησης σε ένα σώμα για να εξαγάγουμε υποψήφια υπερνύμια και να αναπαράγουμε τις διαδρομές εξάρτησής τους ως διάνυσμα χαρακτηριστικών. Το διάνυσμα χαρακτηριστικών συνδέεται με ένα διάνυσμα χαρακτηριστικών που λαμβάνεται χρησιμοποιώντας το προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης όρων της Βικιπαίδειας. Το συνδεδεμένο διάνυσμα χαρακτηριστικών ταιριάζει σε μια εποπτευόμενη μέθοδο μηχανικής μάθησης για να μάθει ένα μοντέλο ταξινομητή. Αυτό το μοντέλο είναι σε θέση να ταξινομήσει τα νέα υποψήφια υπερώνυμα ως υπερώνυμα ή όχι. Το σύστημά μας λειτουργεί καλά για να ανακαλύψει νέα υπερνύματα που δεν ορίζονται σε χρυσά υπερνύματα.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban bemutatjuk javasolt rendszerünket (EXPR) a SemEval 2018 hipernim felfedezési feladatában való részvételre. A feladat azzal a kihívással foglalkozik, hogy egy szövegkorpuszból felfedezzük a hipernim kapcsolatokat. Javaslatunk a pályaalapú technika és a disztribúciós technika kombinált megközelítése. Függőségi elemzőt használunk egy korpuszon a jelölt hipernímek kivonására és a függőségi útvonalaikat jellemző vektorként jelenítjük meg. A funkcióvektor összekapcsolódik egy funkcióvektorral, amelyet a Wikipédia előzetesen képzett kifejezési beágyazási modell használatával kaptunk. Az összekapcsolt funkcióvektor illeszkedik egy felügyelt gépi tanulási módszerhez, hogy tanuljon egy osztályozó modell. Ez a modell képes az új jelölt hipernímeket hipernímként vagy sem besorolni. Rendszerünk jól teljesít az arany hipernímekben nem definiált új hipernímek felfedezésében.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo il nostro sistema proposto (EXPR) per partecipare al compito di scoperta dell'ipernimo di SemEval 2018. Il compito affronta la sfida di scoprire relazioni ipernimiche da un corpus di testo. La nostra proposta è un approccio combinato di tecnica path-based e tecnica distributiva. Usiamo il parser di dipendenza su un corpus per estrarre gli ipernimi candidati e rappresentare i loro percorsi di dipendenza come vettore di funzionalità. Il vettore di funzionalità è concatenato con un vettore di funzionalità ottenuto utilizzando il modello di embedding dei termini pre-addestrato di Wikipedia. Il vettore di funzionalità concatenato si adatta a un metodo di apprendimento automatico supervisionato per imparare un modello di classificatore. Questo modello è in grado di classificare gli ipernimi nuovi candidati come ipernimi o meno. Il nostro sistema funziona bene per scoprire nuovi ipernimi non definiti negli ipernimi d'oro.", 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენი მიზემი სისტემა (EXPR) დავიწყებთ, რომ 2018 წლის SemEval-ის ჰიპერნიმური აღმოჩენების დავაწყება. პარამეტრები აღწევს ტექსტის კორპუსდან ჰიპერნიმის შესახებ. ჩვენი პროგრამები არის კომბიუნტური პროგრამები, რომელიც გზავნის ტექნექტიკა და გაყოფილი ტექნექტიკა. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ კოპპუსს დასამხოლოდ კონდიდეტური ჰიპერნიმების გამოყენება და გამოყენება მათი დასამხოლობა გექნების როგორც ფუნქციური გვქტორი. პროგრამეტური ვექტორი გამოყენებულია, რომელიც ვიკიპედიაში უნდა დასწავლა ტერმინის მოდულის გამოყენება. კლასიფიკაციური მოდელის შესწავლისთვის შესახებ მაქანის სწავლისთვის გადასწავლა. ეს მოდელი შეუძლია ახალი კანდიდენტის ჰიპერნიმის კლასიფიკაცია როგორც ჰიპერნიმი. ნაქარა ჟთჟრვმა ოპაგთ ეჲბპვ ეა ჲრკპთვ ნჲგთ ჳთოვპნთმთ, კჲთრჲ ნვ ვ ევфиნთპანთ გ ჱლარნთრვ ჳთოვპნთმთ.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го претставуваме нашиот предложен систем (ЕКСПР) за учество во задачата за откривање на хипернимите на SemEval 2018. Оваа задача го решава предизвикот да се откријат хипернимски односи од текст корпус. Our proposal is a combined approach of path-based technique and distributional technique.  Користиме анализатор за зависност од корпус за да ги извадиме кандидатските хиперними и да ги претставуваме нивните патишта за зависност како вектор на карактеристика. Векторот на карактеристиките е концентриран со вектор на карактеристиките добиен со користење на предобучениот модел за вградување на терминот на Википедија. Концентрираниот вектор на функции се совпаѓа со надгледуван метод на машинско учење за да се научи модел на класификатор. Овој модел може да ги класификува новите кандидатски хиперними како хиперними или не. Нашиот систем успева да открие нови хиперними кои не се дефинирани во златни хиперними.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз 2018 жылдың semiEval тапсырмасына қатысу үшін жүйемізді (EXPR) таңдаймыз. Тапсырма мәтін корпустың гипернимдік қатынасын табуының мәселесін шешу. Біздің ұсынысымыз - жолды негізделген техника және тарату техникасының біріктірілген тәсілі. Біз корпус тәуелдік параметрлерін кандидатты гипернимдерді тарқату үшін және олардың тәуелдік жолдарын мүмкіндік векторы ретінде көрсету үшін қолданамыз. Функциялық векторы Википедия алдын- талап етілген терминді ендіру үлгісімен алынған функциялық векторымен біріктірілген. Сәйкес функциялық векторы классификациялық үлгісін үйрену үшін бақылайтын машинаны үйрену әдісіне сәйкес келеді. Бұл үлгі жаңа кандидатты гипернимдерді гиперним ретінде классификацияланады. Жүйеміз алтын гипернимде анықталмаған жаңа гипернимдерді табу үшін жақсы істейді.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018ലെ ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച് ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്നും ഹൈപ്രെനിമിന്\u200dറെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ വ്യാല്\u200dക Our proposal is a combined approach of path-based technique and distributional technique.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പ്രദര്\u200dശനം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിതിയുടെ ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമം പുറത്തെടുക്ക വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ മുന്നില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വെക്റ്റര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു് ലഭ്യമായ ഒരു പ്രത്യേക വെക്റ്റര്\u200d വ കോണ്\u200dക്കെന്റ് ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഗുണപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d നി ഈ മോഡലിന് പുതിയ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന പുതിയ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിതിയുടെ ഹൈപ്പെനിമിനെ ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമായി ക പുതിയ ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് നന്നായി പ്രവര്\u200dത', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome savo pasiūlytą sistemą (EXPR) dalyvauti 2018 m. SemEval hiperinimo atradimo užduotyje. Ši užduotis skirta iššūkiui nustatyti hipernimų santykius iš teksto korpuso. Mūsų pasiūlymas yra bendras keliu grindžiamo metodo ir paskirstymo metodo metodas. Naudojame priklausomybės analizatorių nuo korpuso, kad ištrauktume kandidatų hiperinimus ir atspindėtume jų priklausomybės kelius kaip savybių vektorių. The feature vector is concatenated with a feature vector obtained using Wikipedia pre-trained term embedding model.  Sutrumpintas savybių vektorius atitinka prižiūrimą mašinų mokymosi metodą, kad būtų galima išmokti klasifikatoriaus model į. Šis modelis gali klasifikuoti naujas kandidatų hiperinimas kaip hiperinimą arba ne. Mūsų sistema gerai veikia nustatydama naujas hiperinimas, neapibrėžiamas aukso hiperinimomis.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw is-sistema proposta tagħna (EXPR) biex tipparteċipa fil-kompitu ta’ skoperta tal-ipernimi ta’ SemEval 2018. Il-kompitu jindirizza l-isfida li jinstabu relazzjonijiet ipernimi minn korpus tat-test. Our proposal is a combined approach of path-based technique and distributional technique.  We use dependency parser on a corpus to extract candidate hypernyms and represent their dependency paths as a feature vector.  Il-vettur tal-karatteristiċi huwa kkonċentrat ma’ vettur tal-karatteristiċi miksub bl-użu ta’ mudell ta’ inkorporazzjoni tat-terminu mħarreġ minn qabel tal-Wikipedia. Il-vettur tal-karatteristiċi kkonċentrati jaqbel ma’ metodu ta’ tagħlim bil-magna superviż biex jitgħallem mudell ta’ klassifikatur. Dan il-mudell jista’ jikklassifika iperinimi kandidati ġodda bħala iperinimi jew le. Is-sistema tagħna tagħna tagħmel tajjeb biex tiskopri iperinimi ġodda mhux definiti fl-iperinimi tad-deheb.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan sistem kami yang diusulkan untuk berpartisipasi dalam tugas penemuan hipernim SemEval 2018. Tugas ini mengatasi cabaran untuk menemukan hubungan hipernim dari korpus teks. cadangan kita adalah pendekatan bergabung teknik berdasarkan laluan dan teknik distribusi. Kami menggunakan penghurai dependensi pada korpus untuk mengekstrak hipernim calon dan mewakili laluan dependensi mereka sebagai vektor ciri. Vektor ciri-ciri disertai dengan vektor ciri-ciri yang diperoleh menggunakan model penyembedding term a pra-dilatih Wikipedia. Vektor ciri-ciri yang bersamaan sesuai dengan kaedah pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi untuk belajar model pengelasah. Model ini boleh mengklasifikasikan hipernim calon baru sebagai hipernim atau tidak. Sistem kita berjaya dengan baik untuk menemukan hipernim baru yang tidak ditakrif dalam hipernim emas.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид 2018 оны SemEval-ын гиперним нээлттэй ажилд оролцохын тулд санал өгсөн системийг (EXPR) тайлбарлаж байна. Үүний даалгавар текст корпусын гиперним харилцааныг олж мэдэх асуудалд тулгарна. Бидний санал бол зам дээр суурилсан техник, хуваарилах техникийн нийлбэр арга юм. Бид корпус дээр хамааралтай хамааралтай хуваагч ашиглаж, хамааралтай гиперним гаргаж, тэдний хамааралтай замыг өөрсдийн тохиромжтой вектор гэж үзүүлдэг. Хэрэглэгчийн вектор Wikipedia дээр сургалтын өмнө сургалтын томъёо оруулах загвартай холбогдож байна. Тодорхойлогдсон тодорхойлолтын вектор дарааллын загварыг сурах хэрэгтэй машины суралцах арга зэрэгтэй. Энэ загвар нь шинэ загварын гиперним гиперним гэдгийг гиперним гэж хэлж чадна. Бидний систем алтын гипернимд тодорхойлж чадахгүй шинэ гиперним олохын тулд сайн ажилладаг.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm sistemul nostru propus (EXPR) pentru a participa la sarcina de descoperire a hipernimului SemEval 2018. Sarcina abordează provocarea descoperirii relațiilor hipernimice dintr-un corpus text. Propunerea noastră este o abordare combinată a tehnicii bazate pe cale și a tehnicii distribuționale. Folosim parser dependență pe un corpus pentru a extrage hipernimele candidate și pentru a reprezenta căile dependenței lor ca vector de caracteristici. Vectorul caracteristicilor este concatenat cu un vector caracteristicilor obținut folosind modelul de încorporare a termenilor pre-instruit de Wikipedia. Vectorul caracteristicilor concatenate se potrivește unei metode de învățare automată supravegheate pentru a învăța un model de clasificare. Acest model este capabil să clasifice hipernimele noi candidate ca hipernime sau nu. Sistemul nostru funcționează bine pentru a descoperi noi hipernime care nu sunt definite în hipernime aurii.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nasz proponowany system (EXPR) do udziału w zadaniu odkrywania hipernimów SemEval 2018. Zadanie podejmuje wyzwanie związane z odkryciem relacji hipernimowych z korpusu tekstowego. Nasza propozycja to połączone podejście techniki opartej na ścieżce i techniki dystrybucji. Używamy parsera zależności od korpusu, aby wyodrębnić hipernimy kandydatów i reprezentować ich ścieżki zależności jako wektor cech. Wektor cech jest łączony z wektorem cech uzyskanym przy użyciu wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu osadzania terminów Wikipedii. Połączony wektor cech pasuje do nadzorowanej metody uczenia maszynowego, aby nauczyć się modelu klasyfikatora. Model ten jest w stanie klasyfikować nowe hipernimy kandydatów jako hipernimy lub nie. Nasz system sprawdza się dobrze w odkrywaniu nowych hipernimów niezdefiniowanych w złotych hipernimach.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi vår foreslått systemet (EXPR) for å delta i oppgåva for hypernymoppdaging av semiEval 2018. Oppgåva adresserer utfordringa til å oppdaga hypernymrelasjonar frå ein tekstkorpus. Vårt forslag er ein kombinasjon tilnærming av banebasert teknikk og distribusjonssteknikk. Vi brukar avhengighetsanalyser på ein korpus for å pakka ut kandidathypernymar og representerer dei avhengighetsstigane som ein funksjonsvektor. Funksjonsvektoren er samsvara med ein funksjonsvektor som er henta ved hjelp av modellen for innbygging av uttrykk frå Wikipedia. Den konkatenerte funksjonsvektoren passar til ein oversikt maskinelæringsmetode for å lære ein klassifiseringsmodul. Denne modellen kan klassifisera nye kandidathypernymar som hypernym eller ikkje. Systemet vårt utfører godt for å oppdaga nye hypernymar som ikkje er definert i gullhypernymar.', 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen presenterar vi vårt föreslagna system (EXPR) för att delta i SemEval 2018 års hypernymfyndighetsuppgift. Uppgiften behandlar utmaningen att upptäcka hypernymrelationer från en textkorpus. Vårt förslag är ett kombinerat tillvägagångssätt av banbaserad teknik och distributionsteknik. Vi använder beroendeparser på en korpus för att extrahera kandidathypernymer och representera deras beroendesökvägar som en funktionsvektor. Funktionen är sammanlänkad med en funktionsvektor som erhållits med hjälp av Wikipedias förklädda terminbäddningsmodell. Den sammankopplade funktionsvektorn passar en övervakad maskininlärningsmetod för att lära sig en klassificeringsmodell. Denna modell kan klassificera nya kandidathypernymer som hypernymer eller inte. Vårt system presterar bra för att upptäcka nya hypernymer som inte definieras i guld hypernymer.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš predloženi sistem (EXPR) da učestvujemo u zadatku hipernima otkrivanja semiEvala 2018. godine. Taj zadatak se bavi izazovom otkrivanja hipernimskih odnosa iz tekstskog korpusa. Naš prijedlog je kombinovan pristup tehnike na putu i distribucijske tehnike. Koristimo analizator ovisnosti o korpusu da izvučemo hipernimu kandidata i predstavimo njihove puteve zavisnosti kao vektor. Vektor funkcije je povezan sa karakterističnim vektorom koji se dobija koristeći predobučeni model integracije termina u Wikipedia. Zaključeni vektor odgovara metodi učenja nadzorne mašine kako bi naučio klasifikacijski model. Ovaj model može klasifikirati nove kandidatne hipernime kao hipernim ili ne. Naš sistem dobro izvodi da otkrijemo nove hipernime koje nisu definisane u zlatnim hipernima.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තට, අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ පද්ධතිය (ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත්මක) පෙන්වන්නම් 2018 සෙම්වේල් ගැන හොයාගන්න හැකියාව මේ වැඩේ පැත්ත කොර්පුස් වලින් හායිපර්නිම් සම්බන්ධය හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තමයි මාර්ගයේ ආධාරිත තාක්ෂණය සහ විද්\u200dයාපනය විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාවක්. අපි කෝර්පුස් එකේ විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය හායිපර්නිම් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න සහ ඔවුන්ගේ අව Name සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර් පරීක්ෂා කරපු පරීක්ෂා කරපු පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dර මේ මොඩේල් අලුත් අයිතිකාරිය හායිපර්නිම් වලින් විශේෂ කරන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ නැහැ. අපේ පද්ධතිය හොඳ වැඩ කරනවා අලුත් හායිපර්නිම් හොයාගන්න කියලා සුන්තු හායිපර්නිම් වල විශ්වා', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், SemEval 2018ன் மேல் கண்டுபிடிப்பு பணியில் பகிர்ந்து கொள்ள எங்கள் பரிந்திருக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பை (EXPR) கூட இந்த செயல் உரை குறிப்புகளில் இருந்து மின்னெழுத்து தொடர்புகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான சவாலை குறிக்கும். எங்கள் பரிந்துரையெல்லாம் பாதைத் தொழில்நுட்பம் மற்றும் பங்கீட்டு தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் ஒன்றா சார்பு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட மேலாளர்களை வெளியேற்ற மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய சார்பு பாதைகளை ஒரு பண்புப் பெக்டராக குறிப்பிடும விகிபிடியாவின் முன் பயிற்சி முன் பயிற்சி வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தி கிடைக்கப்பட்ட பண்புக்கூடிய ந The concatenated feature vector fits a supervised machine learning method to learn a classifier model. இந்த மாதிரி புதிய தேர்ந்தெடுப்பான ஹைப்ரென்னிம் என்று வகைப்படுத்த முடியும். எங்கள் அமைப்பு புதிய ஹைப்பரிம்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க நன்றாக செயல்படுகிறது.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اپنی پیشنهاد سیستم (EXPR) کو پیشنهاد کیا ہے کہ 2018 کے سامنے سطمئل کی جگہ حاصل کریں۔ اس کام نے ایک ٹیکسٹ کورپوس سے ہیرنیم رابطہ تلاش کرنے کی چال کا مشکل کیا ہے. ہماری پیشنهاد راہ کی بنیادی تکنیک اور تقسیم کی تکنیک کا ایک جوڑا طریقہ ہے۔ ہم ایک کورپوس پر اعتمادی پارچر استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کاندینڈیٹ ہیرنیم کو اچک لیں اور ان کے اعتمادی مسیروں کو ایک فرصت ویکتور کے طور پر نمایش کریں. ویکیپیڈیا کے مطابق پہلے ترین ترین ٹریمینڈنگ موڈل کے مطابق حاصل ہونے والی ویکتور کے ساتھ متصل ہوا ہے. ایک کلاسپیر موڈل سکھانے کے لئے ایک سرپرست ماشین سکھانے کے مطابق ویکتور مطابق ہے. یہ موڈل نیا کاندینڈیٹ ہیرنیم کو ہیرنیم کے طور پر کلاس کرسکتا ہے یا نہیں۔ ہماری سیستم بہت اچھی طرح عمل کرتا ہے کہ نئی ہیرنیم کو دیکھ سکتے ہیں جو سونے ہیرنیم میں نہیں پڑھی جاتی۔', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ku qornaa nidaamka la soo jeeday (EXPR) si aan uga qayb galno qasabka la soo ogaado jaamacadda ee SemEval 2018. Shaqadu wuxuu ku qoran yahay dhibaatada laga ogaado xiriirka qofka aad ka hesho qoraalka. Aqoonsheenna waa qaabab isku qasban teknolojiyo iyo qaybsan. Waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa baaritaanka ku xiran, si aan u soo bixino qof madax ah, oo aan u dhigno wadooyinkooda ay ku xiran tahay wadooyin gaar ah. Vector qurxootiga waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa vector gaar ah oo lagu helay isticmaalka Wikipedia sameynta qoraalka ka horeysa oo la tababaray. Vector ku habboon qalabka waxbarashada ee machadka la ilaaliyey wuxuu ku habboon yahay qaab lagu baro tusaale ahaan fasax. Tusaaladan wuxuu u qeyb-gelin karaa mushaarka cusub sida hypernym oo kale. nidaamkayagu si wanaagsan buu u shaqeeyaa si uu u ogaado hiwaayadaha cusub oo aan lagu qorin dabeecada dahabka ah.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz SemEval 2018'ning hypernym discovery vazifasiga qayta ishlashimizni (EXPR) hozir qilamiz. Name Бизнинг суҳбатларимиз йўл-ёзилган teknik ва тақсимланган манфаатларга тўпланган қисм. Biz ishlatadigan kompyuterdagi tasdiqlarni foydalanamiz, kandida hypernimni chiqarish va ularning ishlatuvchi yoʻllarini moslash vectori sifatida koʻrsatish uchun ishlatuvchi parameterdan foydalanamiz. Name Name Ushbu model hypernym sifatida yangi kandida hypernymni koʻrsatish mumkin. Bizning tizimmiz gul hypernimlarda aniqlangan yangi hypernimni aniqlash uchun yaxshi ishlaydi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu hệ thống đã đề nghị tham gia vào nhiệm vụ khám phá siêu cuồng của SemEvl 208. Nhiệm vụ giải quyết thử thách tìm ra các mối quan hệ siêu năng từ tập đoàn văn bản. Lời đề nghị của chúng tôi là một phương pháp phối hợp kỹ thuật con đường. Chúng tôi sử dụng nhân viên phân tích phụ thuộc của một tập đoàn để trích xuất các ứng cử viên siêu năng và đại diện những đường đi phụ thuộc như một tính năng. Giá trị tính năng được xác định với một véc- tơ đặc trưng được lấy bằng Wikipedia đã được đào tạo tạo từ điển. Giá trị của các đặc trưng được xác định phù hợp với một phương pháp giám sát học máy để học mô hình phân loại. Mô hình này có khả năng phân loại các ứng viên mới có tên gọi là hypernym (hyperdony) hay không. Hệ thống của chúng ta tiến hành tốt để khám phá các siêu năng mới chưa được xác định trong các siêu âm vàng.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме нашата предложена система за участие в задачата за откриване на хиперними на СемЕвал 2018. Задачата е насочена към предизвикателството да се открият хипернимни връзки от текстов корпус. Нашето предложение е комбиниран подход на пътебазирана техника и дистрибуционна техника. Използваме анализатор на зависимости на корпус, за да извлечем кандидат хиперними и да представим техните пътища на зависимост като вектор на функцията. Векторът на характеристиките е конкатениран с вектор на характеристиките, получен с помощта на предварително обучен модел за вграждане на термини в Уикипедия. Векторът на конкатенираните функции се вписва в контролиран метод на машинно обучение, за да научи модел на класификация. Този модел е в състояние да класифицира нови кандидати хиперними като хиперним или не. Системата ни работи добре, за да открие нови хиперними, които не са дефинирани в златните хиперними.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi vores foreslåede system (EXPR) til at deltage i opgaven med hypernym opdagelse af SemEval 2018. Opgaven løser udfordringen ved at opdage hypernymrelationer fra et tekstkorpus. Vores forslag er en kombineret tilgang til banebaseret teknik og distributionsteknik. Vi bruger afhængighedsfortolker på et korpus til at udtrække kandidathypernymer og repræsentere deres afhængighedsstier som en funktionsvektor. Funktionen vektoren er sammenkoblet med en funktionsvektor opnået ved hjælp af Wikipedia præ-trænet term embedding model. Den sammenkoblede funktionsvektor passer til en overvåget maskinlæringsmetode til at lære en klassificeringsmodel. Denne model er i stand til at klassificere nye kandidathypernymer som hypernymer eller ej. Vores system fungerer godt til at opdage nye hypernymer, der ikke er defineret i guld hypernymer.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we ons voorgestelde systeem (EXPR) om deel te nemen aan de hyperniem discovery taak van SemEval 2018. De taak pakt de uitdaging aan om hyperniemrelaties uit een tekstcorpus te ontdekken. Ons voorstel is een gecombineerde aanpak van pad-based techniek en distributietechniek. We gebruiken afhankelijkheidsparser op een corpus om kandidaat-hyperniemen te extraheren en hun afhankelijkheidspaden weer te geven als een kenmerkvector. De kenmerkvector wordt samengevoegd met een kenmerkvector verkregen met behulp van Wikipedia voorgetrainde term embedding model. De aaneengesloten kenmerkvector past bij een begeleide machine learning methode om een classificatiemodel te leren. Dit model is in staat om nieuwe kandidaat-hyperniemen te classificeren als hyperniem of niet. Ons systeem presteert goed om nieuwe hyperniemen te ontdekken die niet gedefinieerd zijn in gouden hyperniemen.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš predloženi sustav (EXPR) da učestvujemo u zadatku hipernima otkrića semiEvala 2018. godine. Taj zadatak rješava izazov otkrivanja hipernimskih odnosa iz teksta korpusa. Naš prijedlog je kombiniran pristup tehnike i distribucijske tehnike na putu. Koristimo analizator ovisnosti o korpusu kako bi izvukli hipernimu kandidata i predstavili njihove puteve ovisnosti kao vektor funkcije. Vektor karakteristike je povezan s karakterističnim vektorom koji se dobija koristeći predobučeni model ugrađenog termina Wikipedia. Komatenirani vektor odgovara metodi učenja nadzornog stroja kako bi naučio klasifikacijski model. Ovaj model može klasifikirati nove kandidatne hipernime kao hipernim ili ne. Naš sustav dobro izvodi da otkrijemo nove hipernime koje nisu definirane u zlatnim hipernima.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unser vorgeschlagenes System (EXPR) vor, um an der Hypernym Discovery Task von SemEval 2018 teilzunehmen. Die Aufgabe befasst sich mit der Herausforderung, Hypernymbeziehungen aus einem Textkorpus zu entdecken. Unser Vorschlag ist ein kombinierter Ansatz aus pfadbasierter Technik und Verteilungstechnik. Wir verwenden Dependency Parser auf einem Korpus, um Kandidatenhypernyme zu extrahieren und deren Abhängigkeitspfade als Merkmalsvektor darzustellen. Der Merkmalsvektor wird mit einem Merkmalsvektor verkettet, der mithilfe eines Wikipedia-vortrainierten Termeinbettungsmodells erhalten wurde. Der verkettete Merkmalsvektor passt zu einer überwachten maschinellen Lernmethode, um ein Klassifikatormodell zu lernen. Dieses Modell ist in der Lage, neue Kandidatenhypernyme als Hypernym zu klassifizieren oder nicht. Unser System funktioniert gut, um neue Hypernyme zu entdecken, die nicht in Goldhypernymen definiert sind.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 SemEval 2018의 슈퍼네임 발견 임무에 참여하기 위해 우리가 제안한 시스템(EXPR)을 제시했다.이 임무는 텍스트 자료 라이브러리에서 초어 관계를 발견하는 도전을 해결했다.우리의 방안은 경로를 바탕으로 하는 기술과 분포식 기술의 결합이다.우리는 자료 라이브러리에서 후보 초어를 추출하기 위해 의존 해상도를 사용하고 의존 경로를 특징 벡터로 표시합니다.이 특징 벡터는 위키백과에서 미리 훈련한 용어를 사용하여 모델에 삽입하여 얻은 특징 벡터와 연결된다.등급 연결 특징 벡터는 기계 학습 방법을 감독하여 분류기 모형을 학습하는 데 적합하다.이 모델은 새로운 후보 초음어를 초음어나 비초음어로 분류할 수 있다.우리 시스템은 황금 초음어에서 정의되지 않은 새로운 초음어를 잘 발견할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan sistem kami yang diusulkan (EXPR) untuk berpartisipasi dalam tugas penemuan hipernim dari SemEval 2018. Tugas ini mengatasi tantangan untuk menemukan hubungan hipernim dari korpus teks. Usaha kita adalah pendekatan kombinasi dari teknik berbasis jalur dan teknik distribusi. Kami menggunakan parser dependensi pada corpus untuk mengekstraksi hipernim kandidat dan mewakili jalur dependensi mereka sebagai vektor fitur. Vektor ciri-ciri dikonsatenasi dengan vektor ciri-ciri yang diperoleh menggunakan model penyembedding istilah praselatih Wikipedia. The concatenated feature vector fits a supervised machine learning method to learn a classifier model.  Model ini mampu mengklasifikasi hipernim kandidat baru sebagai hipernim atau tidak. Sistem kita bekerja dengan baik untuk menemukan hipernim baru yang tidak didefinisikan dalam hipernim emas.', 'sw': 'In this paper, we present our proposed system (EXPR) to participate in the hypernym discovery task of SemEval 2018.  Kazi hiyo inazungumzia changamoto ya kutambua mahusiano ya umeme kutoka kwenye makampuni ya maandishi. pendekezo letu ni njia ya pamoja ya teknolojia na usambazaji wa njia. Tunatumia mchambuzi wa kutegemea kwenye viungo vya kompyuta ili kutengeneza umeme wa mgombea na kuwakilisha njia zao za kutegemea kama vector ya kipekee. Vector hiyo inaunganishwa na vector inayopatikana kwa kutumia Wikipedia mifano ya kipindi kilichojifunza. Vector yenye utaratibu unaohusika inaweza kupata njia ya kujifunza kwa mashine inayochunguzwa ili kujifunza mifano ya usambazaji. Mfano huu una uwezo wa kutangaza hisia mpya za mgombea kama sura au la. Mfumo wetu unafanya kazi vizuri kutambua vifaa vipya ambavyo havina ufafanuzi katika vifaa vya dhahabu.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, 2018-nji ýylda SemEval'yň hipernimiň açylyk işine çykmak üçin teklip edilen sistemamyzy (EXPR) berýäris Meýdança tekst korpusdan hipernim baglaşyklary tapmakyň kynçylygyny çözýär. Biziň teklibimiz ýolu tabanly tekniki we daýlamak tekniki bilen birleşmiş bir nusgadyr. Biz kandidat hipernimleri çıkarmak için korpus üzerinde bağlılık ayıracağımızı kullanırız ve bağlılık yollarını özellikler vektörü olarak gösteriyoruz. The vector is concatenated with a feature vector obtained using Wikipedia pre-trained term embedding model. Beklenmiş bir vektör klassifik modeli öğrenmek için gözetlenmiş makine öğrenme yöntemine uyuyor. Bu nusga täze kandidat hipernymlary hipernim ýaly synplanyp biler. Biziñ sistemamyz täze hipernimleri altyn hipernimlerde tanyşdyrmak üçin gowy işleýär.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim sistemin tonë të propozuar (EXPR) për të marrë pjesë në detyrën e zbulimit të hipernimeve të SemEval 2018. Detyra trajton sfidën e zbulimit të marrëdhënieve hiperinime nga një korpus teksti. Propozimi ynë është një metodë e kombinuar e teknikës bazuar në rrugë dhe teknikës shpërndarëse. Ne përdorim analizuesin e varësisë në një korpus për të nxjerrë hipernimet kandidate dhe për të përfaqësuar rrugët e tyre të varësisë si një vektor karakteristike. Vektori i funksionimit është i lidhur me një vektor të funksionimit të fituar duke përdorur modelin e përfshirjes së termave të paratrajnuar në Wikipedia. Vektori i shkurtuar i funksionimit përshtatet me një metodë mësimi të mbikqyrur të makinës për të mësuar një model klasifikues. Ky model është në gjendje të klasifikojë hipernimet e reja kandidate si hipernim apo jo. Sistemi ynë funksionon mirë për të zbuluar hipernima të reja që nuk janë të përcaktuara në hipernima të artë.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorsien ons voorgestelde stelsel (EXPR) om in die hipernieme ontdekking taak van SemEval 2018 te deel. Die taak adreseer die uitdrukking van die ontdekking van hipernieme verhouding van 'n teks korpus. Ons voorstel is 'n gekombineerde toegang van pad-gebaseerde tekniks en verspreidingstekniks. Ons gebruik afhanklikheidspanseerder op 'n korpus om kandidate hipernyme te uitpak en hulle afhanklikheidspasies as 'n funksie vektor te verteenwoordig. Name Die samelekteerde funksie vektor pas op 'n superviseerde masjien leer metode om 'n klassifiseerde model te leer. Hierdie model is in staat na klassifiseer nuwe kandidate hipernies as hypernym of nie. Ons stelsel doen goed om nuwe hipernyme te ontdek wat nie in goud hipernyme gedefinieerd is nie.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የሳምEval 2018 አፍሪም ግንኙነት ለመጋጠም የተፈቀደውን ስርዓታችንን (EXPR) እናቀርባለን፡፡ የስራ ግንኙነት ከጽሑፍ ኮርፓስ ማግኘት የhypernym ግንኙነትን ለመግለጥ ጥላቻን ያቆማል፡፡ የፕሮጀክታችን የመንገድ ስህተት እና የመለያየት ስህተት ነው፡፡ የተደገመ ምርጫዎችን በቆርፓስ ላይ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች ምርጫዎች This model is able to classify new candidate hypernyms as hypernym or not.  አዲስ አፍሪሜን በወርቅ አፍሪም ያልታወቀ ሲታወቅ ስርዓታችን መልካም ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր առաջարկած համակարգը\' մասնակցելու 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" հիպերնիմային հայտնագործման գործին: Այս խնդիրը լուծում է գերնիմային հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերման խնդիրը տեքստի կորպոսից: Մեր առաջարկությունը ուղղությամբ հիմնված տեխնիկայի և բաշխման միավոր մոտեցում է: Մենք օգտագործում ենք կախվածության վերլուծումը մարմնի վրա, որպեսզի ստանանք թեկնածու հիպերնիմներ և ներկայացնենք նրանց կախվածության ուղիները որպես հատկանիշ վեկտոր: Այս հատկանիշների վեկտորը համապատասխանվում է մի հատկանիշների վեկտորի հետ, որը ստացվում է Վիքիփեդիայի նախապատրաստված տերմինի ներգրավման մոդելի օգնությամբ: Համակերպված հատկությունների վեկտորը համապատասխանում է մեքենայի ուսուցման վերահսկված մեթոդին դասակարգման մոդելի սովորելու համար: Այս մոդելը կարողանում է դասակարգել նոր թեկնածու հիպերնիմները հիպերնիմներով կամ ոչ: Մեր համակարգը լավ է աշխատում հայտնաբերելու նոր հիպերնիմներ, որոնք չեն սահմանվում ոսկու հիպերնիմներում:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত সিস্টেম (EXPR) উপস্থাপন করি সেমইভাল ২০১৮ এর হাইপারেনিম আবিষ্কার কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করতে। টেক্সট কোর্পাস থেকে হাইপারেনিম সম্পর্ক আবিষ্কারের চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলেছে। আমাদের প্রস্তাব হচ্ছে রাস্তা ভিত্তিক প্রযুক্তি এবং বিতরণ প্রযুক্তির একটি একত্রিত উপায়। আমরা কোর্পাসের উপর নির্ভর প্রস্তাব ব্যবহার করি প্রার্থী হাইপারেনিম বের করে তাদের নির্ভরিত পথ হিসেবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করি। উইকিপিডিয়া পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মেয়াদ ব্যবহার করে একটি বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী ভেক্টরের সাথে যোগাযোগ করা হয়েছে। একত্রিত বৈশিষ্ট্যের ভেক্টর একটি পর্যবেক্ষক মেশিন শিক্ষার পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে উপস্থিত। এই মডেলটি হাইপারেনিম হিপারেনিম হিসাবে নতুন প্রার্থী হাইপারেনিম ক্লাস করতে পারে। আমাদের সিস্টেম সোনার হাইপারেনিমে নতুন হাইপারেনিম আবিষ্কার করার জন্য ভালো কাজ করে।', 'az': "Bu kağızda, 2018-ci SemEval'in hipernim keşfetməsi işin ə katılmaq üçün təklif edilmiş sistemimizi (EXPR) göstəririk. Görev bir mətn korpusundan hipernim əlaqələrini keçmək üçün çətinliklə çəkilir. Bizim təklifimiz yol tabanlı tekniklərin və dağıtış tekniklərin birləşdirilməsi üçün bir yoldur. Biz bir korpus üzərində bağımlılıq parçacısını kandidat hipernimləri çıxartmaq və onların bağımlılıq yollarını özellik vektörü olaraq göstəririk. Xüsusiyyət vektoru Wikipedia əvvəl təhsil edilmiş termin içərisində alınan bir xüsusiyyət vektoru ilə birləşdirildir. Sınıflandırılmış xüsusiyyət vektörü klassifik modeli öyrənmək üçün gözləyirli maşın öyrənmə metodlarına uyuşur. Bu model yeni kandidát hipernimləri hipernim olaraq dəyişdirə bilər. Sistemimiz altın hipernimlərdə tanımamayan yeni hipernimləri yaxşı keçmək üçün yaxşı işlər edir.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš predloženi sistem (EXPR) da učestvujemo u zadatku hipernima otkrića semiEvala 2018. Taj zadatak je riješio izazov otkrivanja hipernimskih odnosa iz teksta korpusa. Naš prijedlog je kombiniran pristup tehnike na putu i distribucijske tehnike. Koristimo analizator ovisnosti o korpusu da izvučemo hipernimu kandidata i predstavimo njihove puteve ovisnosti kao vektor. Vektor funkcije je povezan sa karakterističnim vektorom koji je dobio koristeći predobučeni model ugrađenog termina Wikipedia. Zaključeni vektor odgovara metodi učenja nadzornog stroja kako bi naučio klasifikacijski model. Ovaj model može klasifikirati nove kandidatne hipernime kao hipernim ili ne. Naš sistem dobro izvodi da otkrijemo nove hipernime koje nisu definisane u zlatnim hipernima.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, presentem el nostre sistema proposat (EXPR) per participar en la tasca de descobriment d'hipernim de SemEval 2018. The task addresses the challenge of discovering hypernym relations from a text corpus.  La nostra proposta és un enfocament combinat de tècnica basada en el camí i tècnica de distribució. Utilitzem un analitzador de dependencies en un corpus per extrair hipernims candidats i representar els seus camins de dependencia com a vector de característiques. El vector de característiques està concatenat amb un vector de característiques obtingut amb un model d'incorporació de termes pré-entrenats de Wikipedia. El vector de característiques concatenades s'ajusta a un mètode d'aprenentatge màquinari supervisat per aprendre un model de classificació. Aquest model és capaç de classificar els hipernims candidats com hipernims o no. El nostre sistema funciona bé per descobrir nous hipernims no definits en hipernims d'or.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، سیستم پیشنهاد ما (EXPR) را برای مشارکت در کار کشف هیپرنیم SemEval 2018 پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. این وظیفه به چالش کشف رابطه های هیپرنیم از یک قالب متن بررسی می کند. پیشنهاد ما یک دستور متحده از تکنیک و تکنیک تقسیم راه است. ما از طراحی بستگی روی یک کورپوس استفاده می کنیم تا هیپرنیم کاندیداتی را خارج کنیم و مسیر بستگی آنها را به عنوان ویکتور ویکتور ویژگی نمایش دهیم. ویکتور ویکتوری با یک ویکتوری ویکتوری که با استفاده از مدل وارد کردن کلمه پیش آموزش داده شده ویکتوریا پیدا شده است. ویکتور ویکتور متصل به یک روش یادگیری ماشین تحت نظر قرار می گیرد تا یک مدل مختصر را یاد بگیرد. این مدل قادر است که هیپرنیم های کاندیداتی جدید را به عنوان هیپرنیم تشکیل دهد یا نه. سیستم ما خوب انجام می دهد تا کشف هیپرنیم جدید را در هیپرنیم طلا تعریف نمی کند.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme náš navržený systém (EXPR) pro účast na zjišťování hypernymů SemEval 2018. Úkol řeší výzvu zjištění hypernymových vztahů z textového korpusu. Náš návrh je kombinovaný přístup cestovní techniky a distribuční techniky. Používáme parser závislostí na korpusu k extrakci kandidátských hypernymů a reprezentování jejich cest závislosti jako funkční vektor. Vektor prvků je řetězen s vektorem prvků získaným pomocí předem trénovaného modelu vkládání termínů Wikipedie. Vektor řetězených prvků se hodí pro metodu strojového učení s dohledem k učení klasifikátorového modelu. Tento model je schopen klasifikovat nové kandidátské hypernymy jako hypernym či nikoli. Náš systém dobře funguje při objevování nových hypernymů, které nejsou definovány ve zlatých hypernymech.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame oma kavandatud süsteemi (EXPR) osalemiseks SemEval 2018 hüpernüümide avastamise ülesandes. Ülesanne käsitleb tekstikorpusest hüpernüümsete seoste avastamise väljakutset. Meie ettepanek on teepõhise tehnika ja jaotusmeetodi kombineeritud lähenemine. Me kasutame korpuse sõltuvuspartserit kandidaatide hüpernüümide ekstraheerimiseks ja nende sõltuvusteede kujutamiseks funktsioonivektorina. Funktsioonivektor on seotud funktsioonivektoriga, mis on saadud Wikipedia eelõpetatud termini manustamise mudeli abil. Ühendatud funktsioonivektor sobib järelevalvega masinõppe meetodile klassifitseerijamudeli õppimiseks. See mudel suudab liigitada uusi kandidaate hüpernüümid hüpernüümideks või mitte. Meie süsteem toimib hästi uute hüpernüümide avastamisel, mida kuldsed hüpernüümid ei ole määratletud.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme ehdotetun järjestelmän (EXPR) osallistumiseksi SemEval 2018:n hypernyymien etsintätehtävään. Tehtävässä käsitellään hypernyymisuhteiden löytämistä tekstikorpusesta. Ehdotuksemme on polkupohjaisen tekniikan ja jakelutekniikan yhdistelmä. Käytämme korpusen riippuvuuden jäsentäjää poimimaan ehdokashypernyymit ja edustamaan niiden riippuvuusreittejä ominaisuusvektorina. Feature vektori on yhdistetty feature vektoriin, joka on saatu käyttämällä Wikipedian ennalta koulutettua termiupotusmallia. Yhdistetty ominaisuusvektori sopii valvottuun koneoppimismenetelmään luokittelijamallin oppimiseen. Tämä malli pystyy luokittelemaan uudet ehdokkaat hypernyymiksi tai ei. Järjestelmämme toimii hyvin uusien hypernyymien löytämisessä, joita ei ole määritelty kultaisissa hypernyymissä.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo naš predlagani sistem (EXPR) za sodelovanje v nalogi odkrivanja hipernimov SemEval 2018. Naloga obravnava izziv odkrivanja hipernimskih relacij iz besedilnega korpusa. Naš predlog je kombiniran pristop tehnike na poti in distribucijske tehnike. Razčlenjevalnik odvisnosti na korpusu uporabljamo za ekstrakcijo kandidatnih hipernimov in predstavitev njihovih poti odvisnosti kot vektor značilnosti. Vektor značilnosti je povezan z vektorjem značilnosti, pridobljenim z uporabo Wikipedijinega vnaprej usposobljenega modela vdelave izrazov. Konatenirani vektor funkcij ustreza nadzorovani metodi strojnega učenja za učenje modela klasifikatorja. Ta model je sposoben razvrstiti nove kandidate hipernim kot hipernim ali ne. Naš sistem dobro deluje pri odkrivanju novih hiperimen, ki niso opredeljeni v zlatih hipernimih.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, munã halatar da aikin da aka buɗa (EXPR) dõmin su yi shirin rabo na fassarar hisãbi na Semeval 2018. Kayan aiki yana tambayar ta kanana da gane danganta na hisani daga wata matsayi. KayyayinMu na zama wata taskaci da ke samu'a ga technki na hanya da gafaka. Munã yi amfani da Paramer da ɗabi'a kan wata nau'i dõmin ka fitar masu canza hisernyms kuma mu ƙayyade hanyõyin da ke dõgara kamar wata shiryarwa na zafi. Ana haɗi shiryori na ɗabi'a da wani mai shiryarwa mai amfani da Wikimedia ya yi amfani da motel mai lokacin da aka amfani da shi gaba ɗaya. Akan haɗi cikin shirin ayuka da aka samu'a, yana daidai da shirin ayuka da aka tsare wa maɓallin tsari. Wannan shirin ya iya iya ƙayyade manyan kandida-yanzu kamar hisernym ko kuma ba. Ga na'asarmu, ya sami aikin ƙwarai dõmin ya gane surori na dabam wanda ba a bayyana a cikin surori na zĩnãriya ba.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים את המערכת המוצעת שלנו (EXPR) כדי להשתתף במשימת גילוי היפרנימי של SemEval 2018. המשימה מתייחסת לאתגר של גילוי יחסים היפרנימיים מקורפוס טקסט. ההצעה שלנו היא גישה משולבת של טכניקה מבוססת על דרכים וטכניקה פיצול. אנחנו משתמשים במחקר תלויות על קורפוס כדי להוציא היפרנימות מועמדים ולמייצג את דרכי ההתלויות שלהם כווקטור תכונות. The feature vector is concatenated with a feature vector obtained using Wikipedia pre-trained term embedding model.  הוקטור התאים מתאים לשיטת לימוד מכונות שמבוטחת ללמוד מודל מסווג. המודל הזה מסוגל לקlassify מועמדים חדשים היפרנימות כהיפרנימות או לא. המערכת שלנו מצליחה לגלות היפרנימות חדשות שלא מוגדרות בהיפרנימות זהב.', 'jv': 'Nang pentungé iki, kita nggawe sistem sing gak nggawe gerakan tanggal nggawe pernik urip nggawe barang kelas nang semebal 2020. task Awak dhéwé nggunakake kuwi gekombisan tékno sing diangkat sabanjuré karo teknik wis disenyarno. We use diphensible charset on a bodus to extract kandate ipernnym and represent their diphensible paths as a character vector. The character vector is concatened with a character vector, generated by winid before-tracted terms embedding model. The concatened character vector match a super Vised device Learning method to Learn a category model. model Sistem-sistem sing songan banget kedagoh kapan uwis rampung liyane', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་ཆེན་པོ(EXPR)རིགས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་SemEval 2018 ཡི་གནས་ཚུལ་མཐོང་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་འཇུག ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཚིག་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་ལས་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པའི་དཀའ་གདོང་ལ་དམིགས ང་ཚོའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་ནི་འགྲུལ་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འཕྲུལ་རིག་གི་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དབུས་པ་ཞིག་གཙང་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ཁྱེད་ཚོའི་དབུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་རྟོགས་ཞིང་། The feature vector is concatenated with a feature vector obtained using Wikipedia pre-trained term embedding model. The concatenated feature vector fits a supervised machine learning method to learn a classifier model. རྣམ་གྲངས་འདིས་ཆེན་པོའི་སྒེར་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ལ་འཛིན་སྤྱོད་ནུས་མེད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་མཐུན་སྣུམ་གྱི་མཐུན་རིམ་གསར་པ་ལ་འཛོམས་སྐྱོང་བ་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Combining explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'ar': 'Meaning_space في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: الجمع بين المعرفة المشفرة صراحة والمعلومات المستخرجة من عمليات دمج الكلمات', 'pt': 'Meaning_space no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Combinando conhecimento explicitamente codificado com informações extraídas de incorporações de palavras', 'fr': 'Meaning_space à SemeVal-2018 Tâche 10\xa0: Combiner des connaissances explicitement codées avec des informations extraites des intégrations de mots', 'es': 'Meaning_space en Semeval-2018 Tarea 10: Combinar conocimiento explícitamente codificado con información extraída de incrustaciones de palabras', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のMEANING_SPACEタスク10:明示的にエンコードされた知識と、単語埋め込みから抽出された情報を組み合わせる', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务10之Meaning_space:以显式编码知与从词销取信息相合', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर Meaning_space: शब्द एम्बेडिंग से निकाली गई जानकारी के साथ स्पष्ट रूप से एन्कोडेड ज्ञान का संयोजन', 'ru': 'Meaning_space на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Объединение явно закодированных знаний с информацией, извлеченной из вложений слов', 'ga': 'Meaning_space ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Eolas ionchódaithe go sainráite a chomhcheangal le faisnéis a bhaintear as leabaithe focal', 'hu': 'Meaning_space a SemEval-2018 10. feladat: A kifejezetten kódolt tudás és a szóbeágyazásokból kinyert információk kombinációja', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Συνδυασμός ρητά κωδικοποιημένης γνώσης με πληροφορίες που εξάγονται από ενσωμάτωση λέξεων', 'it': 'Meaning_space a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combinare conoscenze codificate esplicitamente con informazioni estratte dalle incorporazioni di parole', 'kk': 'Орындау_ бос орын 10 тапсырмасында: сөздерді ендіру мәліметтерімен біріктіру', 'ka': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'lt': '10 užduotis: aiškiai koduotų žinių derinimas su informacija, gauta iš žodžių įterpimo', 'mk': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'mt': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് വ്യക്തമായി കോണ്\u200dകോഡിങ് ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10: explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embedding', 'pl': 'Zadanie 10: Łączenie wyraźnie zakodowanej wiedzy z informacjami ekstraktowanymi z osadzeń słów', 'no': 'Meaning_space at semiEval-2018 Task 10: Kombinerer eksplisivt koda kunnskap med informasjon ekstrahert frå ordinnbygging', 'ms': 'Maksud_ruang pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menggabungkan pengetahuan terkod secara eksplicit dengan maklumat yang diekstrak dari penyambungan perkataan', 'ro': 'Meaning_space la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Combinarea cunoștințelor codificate explicit cu informațiile extrase din încorporarea cuvintelor', 'sr': 'Meaning_space at semiEval-2018 Task 10: Combining explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'sv': 'Meaning_space på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Kombinera explicit kodad kunskap med information som extraheras från ordinbäddningar', 'si': 'mean_space at Halfeval-2018', 'so': 'Meel_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining bayaan aqoon with information extracted from word embedding', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10 میں معنی_space: کلمات انڈینگ سے نکالے ہوئے معلومات کے ساتھ واضح طور پر علم کا اتصال کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Eval- 2018 Vazifani 10:', 'vi': 'Nghĩa là Thoát trong Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 10: kết hợp hiểu biết được mã hóa trực tiếp với thông tin chiết xuất từ sự nhúng từ', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Комбиниране на изрично кодирано знание с информация, извлечена от вграждането на думи', 'nl': 'Taak 10: Het combineren van expliciet gecodeerde kennis met informatie uit woordembeddingen', 'hr': 'Meaning_space na pola Eval-2018 zadatku 10: Kombiniranje pojasno kodiranih znanja s informacijama izvučenim iz riječi ugrađenja', 'da': 'Meaning_space på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Kombination af eksplicit kodet viden med oplysninger udvundet fra ordindlejringer', 'id': 'Artinya_ruang di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menggabungkan pengetahuan secara eksplicit dengan informasi yang diekstraksi dari penyambungan kata', 'fa': 'Meaning_space at semiEval-2018 Task 10: Combining explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'de': 'Meaning_space bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Verknüpfung explizit kodierten Wissens mit Informationen aus Worteinbettungen', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 퀘스트 10: 현식 인코딩의 지식을 단어 삽입에서 추출한 정보와 결합', 'sw': 'Inamaanisha_nafasi katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 10: Kuunga ujuzi wa wazi umewekwa na taarifa zilizotolewa kutoka kwa maneno', 'tr': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10: explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'af': 'Meaning_space by SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Kombineer uitsonderlike kodeerde kennis met inligting uitgevoer van woord inbêding', 'sq': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'hy': 'Նշանակություն_տարածք, որը կազմում է SEMewal-2018-ի 10-րդ հանձնարարությունը. բացահայտորեն կոդավորված գիտելիքների համադրումը բառերի ներգրավման ինֆորմացիայի հետ', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 10:', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Kelimd…ôn √ßńĪxarńĪlan m…ôlumat il…ô a√ßńĪq-aydńĪn kodlanmńĪŇü bilgi il…ô birl…ôŇüdirilm…ôsi', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের মানে _স্পেস: শব্দ থেকে বের করা তথ্যের সাথে স্পষ্ট তথ্য সংগ্রহ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Meaning_space na semiEval-2018 zadatku 10: Kombiniranje jasno kodiranih znanja sa informacijama izvučenim iz rečenica', 'ca': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'cs': 'Úloha 10: Kombinace explicitně kódovaných znalostí s informacemi extrahovanými z vložení slov', 'et': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 10: selgesõnaliselt kodeeritud teadmiste kombineerimine sõna manustamisest saadud teabega', 'fi': 'Meaning_space SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Selkeästi koodatun tiedon yhdistäminen sanaupotuksista poimittuun tietoon', 'jv': 'For', 'sk': 'Meaning_space na SemEval-2018 Naloga 10: Združevanje eksplicitno kodiranega znanja z informacijami, pridobljenimi iz vgradnje besed', 'ha': 'Makanin _filia SemEal-2018 Tafiyar da 10: Combining ilmi baya-bayyane kodi da information wanda ya fito daga word embedded', 'he': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining explicitly encoded knowledge with information extracted from word embeddings', 'bo': 'Meaning_space at SemEval-2018 Task 10:'}
{'en': 'This paper presents the two systems submitted by the meaning space team in Task 10 of the SemEval competition 2018 entitled Capturing discriminative attributes. The systems consist of combinations of approaches exploiting explicitly encoded knowledge about concepts in WordNet and information encoded in distributional semantic vectors. Rather than aiming for high performance, we explore which kind of semantic knowledge is best captured by different methods. The results indicate that WordNet glosses on different levels of the hierarchy capture many attributes relevant for this task. In combination with exploiting word embedding similarities, this source of information yielded our best results. Our best performing system ranked 5th out of 13 final ranks. Our analysis yields insights into the different kinds of attributes represented by different sources of knowledge.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta os dois sistemas apresentados pela equipe do espaço de significado na Tarefa 10 da competição SemEval 2018 intitulada Capturando atributos discriminativos. Os sistemas consistem em combinações de abordagens que exploram conhecimento explicitamente codificado sobre conceitos em WordNet e informações codificadas em vetores semânticos de distribuição. Em vez de buscar alto desempenho, exploramos qual tipo de conhecimento semântico é melhor capturado por diferentes métodos. Os resultados indicam que as glosas do WordNet em diferentes níveis da hierarquia capturam muitos atributos relevantes para esta tarefa. Em combinação com a exploração de semelhanças de incorporação de palavras, essa fonte de informação rendeu nossos melhores resultados. Nosso sistema com melhor desempenho ficou em 5º entre 13 classificações finais. Nossa análise fornece insights sobre os diferentes tipos de atributos representados por diferentes fontes de conhecimento.', 'ar': 'تعرض هذه الورقة النظامين المقدمين من فريق معنى الفضاء في المهمة 10 من مسابقة SemEval 2018 بعنوان التقاط السمات التمييزية. تتكون الأنظمة من مجموعات من الأساليب التي تستغل المعرفة المشفرة بشكل واضح حول المفاهيم في WordNet والمعلومات المشفرة في المتجهات الدلالية التوزيعية. بدلاً من استهداف الأداء العالي ، نستكشف أي نوع من المعرفة الدلالية يتم التقاطه بشكل أفضل من خلال الطرق المختلفة. تشير النتائج إلى أن WordNet يلمع على مستويات مختلفة من التسلسل الهرمي يلتقط العديد من السمات ذات الصلة بهذه المهمة. بالاقتران مع استغلال أوجه التشابه في تضمين الكلمات ، أسفر مصدر المعلومات هذا عن أفضل النتائج. حصل نظامنا الأفضل أداءً على المرتبة الخامسة من بين 13 ترتيبًا نهائيًا. يقدم تحليلنا رؤى حول الأنواع المختلفة للسمات التي تمثلها مصادر المعرفة المختلفة.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta los dos sistemas presentados por el equipo del espacio de significado en la Tarea 10 de la competencia SemEval 2018 titulada Capturing discriminative attributes. Los sistemas consisten en combinaciones de enfoques que explotan el conocimiento codificado explícitamente sobre los conceptos de WordNet y la información codificada en vectores semánticos distribucionales. En lugar de apuntar a un alto rendimiento, exploramos qué tipo de conocimiento semántico se capta mejor con diferentes métodos. Los resultados indican que las glosas de WordNet en diferentes niveles de la jerarquía capturan muchos atributos relevantes para esta tarea. En combinación con la explotación de similitudes de inserción de palabras, esta fuente de información produjo nuestros mejores resultados. Nuestro sistema de mejor desempeño ocupó el quinto lugar de los 13 rangos finales. Nuestro análisis proporciona información sobre los diferentes tipos de atributos representados por las diferentes fuentes de conocimiento.', 'fr': "Cet article présente les deux systèmes soumis par l'équipe de l'espace sens dans la tâche 10 du concours SemEval 2018 intitulé Capturing discriminative attributes. Les systèmes consistent en des combinaisons d'approches exploitant des connaissances explicitement codées sur des concepts dans WordNet et des informations codées dans des vecteurs sémantiques distributionnels. Plutôt que de viser des performances élevées, nous explorons quel type de connaissance sémantique est le mieux capturé par différentes méthodes. Les résultats indiquent que les gloses WordNet à différents niveaux de la hiérarchie capturent de nombreux attributs pertinents pour cette tâche. Combinée à l'exploitation des similitudes d'intégration de mots, cette source d'information a donné nos meilleurs résultats. Notre système le plus performant s'est classé 5e sur 13 classements finaux. Notre analyse permet de mieux comprendre les différents types d'attributs représentés par les différentes sources de connaissances.", 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEvalコンペティション2018のタスク10において、意味空間チームが提出した「差別的属性の捕捉」と題された2つのシステムを紹介する。このシステムは、WordNetの概念に関する明示的に符号化された知識と、分布セマンティックベクトルで符号化された情報を利用するアプローチの組み合わせで構成されています。高いパフォーマンスを目指すのではなく、さまざまな方法によってどのような意味論的知識が最もよく捉えられるかを探求します。結果は、階層のさまざまなレベルのWordNetグロスが、このタスクに関連する多くの属性をキャプチャしていることを示しています。言葉の埋め込みの類似性を利用することと組み合わせて、この情報源は私たちの最良の結果をもたらしました。最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するシステムは、最終的に13ランク中5位にランクインしました。私たちの分析は、さまざまな知識源によって表されるさまざまな種類の属性に関する洞察を生み出します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval प्रतियोगिता 2018 के कार्य 10 में अर्थ अंतरिक्ष टीम द्वारा प्रस्तुत दो प्रणालियों को प्रस्तुत करता है जिसका शीर्षक भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करना है। प्रणालियों में वर्डनेट में अवधारणाओं के बारे में स्पष्ट रूप से एन्कोडेड ज्ञान का शोषण करने वाले दृष्टिकोणों के संयोजन और वितरण ता्मक शब्दार्थ वैक्टर में एन्कोडेड जानकारी शामिल हैं। उच्च प्रदर्शन के लिए लक्ष्य रखने के बजाय, हम यह पता लगाते हैं कि किस प्रकार के शब्दार्थ ज्ञान को विभिन्न तरीकों से सबसे अच्छा कब्जा कर लिया गया है। परिणाम इंगित करते हैं कि पदानुक्रम के विभिन्न स्तरों पर WordNet glosses इस कार्य के लिए प्रासंगिक कई विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करता है। शब्द एम्बेडिंग समानताओं का शोषण करने के साथ संयोजन में, जानकारी के इस स्रोत ने हमारे सर्वोत्तम परिणाम दिए। हमारा सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाली प्रणाली 13 अंतिम रैंकों में से 5 वें स्थान पर है। हमारा विश्लेषण ज्ञान के विभिन्न स्रोतों द्वारा प्रतिनिधित्व की जाने वाली विभिन्न प्रकार की विशेषताओं में अंतर्दृष्टि उत्पन्न करता है।', 'zh': '本文引义空间团队在2018年SemEval竞赛之任10中提交二统,题曰"获判别属性"。 此WordNet之大略也显式编码知识布语义向量编码息之道也。 吾不求高性能,求何语义知莫若异术。 结果表明,WordNet 光泽层次结构,多得与此任务性。 合用词嵌相似性,此信息源生吾最。 至善系13终列名排名第5。 吾言可以深知异知之所由来者异性也。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлены две системы, представленные командой Space в Задаче 10 конкурса SemEval 2018 под названием «Захват дискриминационных признаков». Системы состоят из комбинаций подходов, использующих явно закодированные знания о концепциях в WordNet и информацию, закодированную в дистрибутивных семантических векторах. Вместо того, чтобы стремиться к высокой производительности, мы исследуем, какие семантические знания лучше всего захватывать различными методами. Результаты показывают, что глоссы WordNet на разных уровнях иерархии фиксируют множество атрибутов, актуальных для этой задачи. В сочетании с использованием сходства вложения слов, этот источник информации дал наши лучшие результаты. Наша самая результативная система заняла 5-е место из 13 финальных рангов. Наш анализ дает представление о различных видах атрибутов, представленных различными источниками знаний.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair an dá chóras a chuir an fhoireann spáis bhrí isteach i dTasc 10 de chomórtas SemEval 2018 dar teideal Gabháil tréithe idirdhealaitheacha. Is éard atá sna córais ná teaglamaí cur chuige a shaothraíonn eolas atá ionchódaithe go sainráite faoi choincheapa in WordNet agus faisnéis atá ionchódaithe i veicteoirí shéimeantacha dáileacháin. Seachas a bheith ag díriú ar ardfheidhmíocht, déanaimid iniúchadh ar an gcineál eolais shéimeantach is fearr a ghabháil trí mhodhanna éagsúla. Tugann na torthaí le fios go n-áiríonn gluaiseanna WordNet ar leibhéil éagsúla den ordlathas go leor tréithe atá ábhartha don tasc seo. I dteannta le leas a bhaint as cosúlachtaí leabú focal, ba é an fhoinse faisnéise seo a thug na torthaí is fearr dúinn. Bhí ár gcóras is fearr feidhmíochta sa 5ú háit as 13 rang deiridh. Tugann ár n-anailís léargas ar na cineálacha éagsúla tréithe a léiríonn foinsí éagsúla eolais.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუნეტი აჩვენებს ორი სისტემები, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია სისტემის განმავლობაში 2018 წლის SemEval კონკრენეტის 10 წლის განმავლობაში. Name მაგრამ უფრო დიდი კეპექციენტის მისამართვად, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ, რომელიც სიმენტიკური ცოცხლება უფრო დიდი განსხვავებული მეტოვებით დავწერა. შედეგი მონაცემებია, რომ WordNet იქნება იერაქტიის განსხვავებული დონეში მრავალი ატრიბუტები, რომელიც ამ დავალებისთვის მნიშვნელოვანია. ამ ინფორმაციის გამოსახულება ჩვენი უკეთესი შედეგების შესაძლებლობით იქნება. ჩვენი საუკეთესო სისტემა 13 წინაღებიდან ხუთი წინაღებულია. ჩვენი ანალიზია განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ატრიბუტებების შესახებ, რომლებიც განსხვავებული მეცნიერების გამოსახებებით.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány bemutatja a jelentéstér csapat által a 2018. évi SemEval verseny 10. feladatában benyújtott két rendszert, diszkriminatív attribútumok rögzítése címmel. A rendszerek olyan megközelítések kombinációjából állnak, amelyek kihasználják a WordNet koncepcióival kapcsolatos explicit kódolt ismereteket és disztribúciós szemantikai vektorokkal kódolt információkat. Ahelyett, hogy a nagy teljesítményre törekednénk, azt vizsgáljuk, hogy a különböző módszerekkel milyen szemantikai ismereteket lehet leginkább rögzíteni. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a WordNet fényesítése a hierarchia különböző szintjein számos, ehhez a feladathoz releváns attribútumot rögzít. A szóbeágyazott hasonlóságok kihasználásával kombinálva ez az információforrás hozta a legjobb eredményeket. A legjobb teljesítményű rendszerünk 13 utolsó rangból az 5. helyen állt. Elemzésünk betekintést nyújt a különböző tudásforrások által képviselt különböző tulajdonságokba.', 'it': 'Questo articolo presenta i due sistemi presentati dal team di significato spaziale nel Task 10 del concorso SemEval 2018 intitolato Catturare attributi discriminatori. I sistemi consistono in combinazioni di approcci che sfruttano conoscenze esplicitamente codificate sui concetti in WordNet e informazioni codificate in vettori semantici distributivi. Piuttosto che puntare ad alte prestazioni, esploriamo quale tipo di conoscenza semantica è meglio catturata da diversi metodi. I risultati indicano che le gloss WordNet su diversi livelli della gerarchia catturano molti attributi rilevanti per questa attività. In combinazione con lo sfruttamento delle somiglianze che incorporano parole, questa fonte di informazioni ha dato i nostri migliori risultati. Il nostro sistema più performante si è classificato quinto su 13 classifiche finali. La nostra analisi fornisce approfondimenti sui diversi tipi di attributi rappresentati dalle diverse fonti di conoscenza.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει τα δύο συστήματα που υποβλήθηκαν από την ομάδα εννοιών διαστήματος στο έργο 10 του διαγωνισμού με τίτλο Καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών. Τα συστήματα αποτελούνται από συνδυασμούς προσεγγίσεων που εκμεταλλεύονται ρητά κωδικοποιημένη γνώση σχετικά με έννοιες στο WordNet και πληροφορίες κωδικοποιημένες σε διανεμητικά σημασιολογικά διανύσματα. Αντί να στοχεύουμε στην υψηλή απόδοση, διερευνούμε ποιο είδος σημασιολογικής γνώσης αποτυπώνεται καλύτερα με διαφορετικές μεθόδους. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι τα γυαλιά σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα της ιεραρχίας συλλαμβάνουν πολλά χαρακτηριστικά σχετικά με αυτήν την εργασία. Σε συνδυασμό με την αξιοποίηση των ομοιοτήτων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, αυτή η πηγή πληροφοριών έφερε τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα. Το σύστημα μας με τις καλύτερες επιδόσεις κατατάχθηκε 5η από τις 13ες τελικές τάξεις. Η ανάλυση μας δίνει πληροφορίες για τα διάφορα είδη χαρακτηριστικών που αντιπροσωπεύονται από διαφορετικές πηγές γνώσης.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ги претставува двата системи поднесени од страна на вселенскиот тим во задачата 10 на натпреварот SemEval 2018 насловен „Фаќање дискриминативни атрибути“. Системите се состојат од комбинации на пристапи кои искористуваат експлицитно кодирано знаење за концептите во WordNet и информации кодирани во дистрибутивните семантични вектори. Наместо да сакаме висока изведба, истражуваме кој вид семантично знаење е најдобро зафатено со различни методи. Резултатите укажуваат на тоа дека WordNet свети на различни нивоа на хиерархијата прифаќаат многу атрибути релевантни за оваа задача. Во комбинација со искористувањето на сличностите на зборовите, изворот на информации ни даде најдобри резултати. Нашиот најдобар систем се рангираше на 5 од 13 последни рангови. Our analysis yields insights into the different kinds of attributes represented by different sources of knowledge.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan dua sistem yang dihantar oleh pasukan ruang angkasa bermakna dalam Tugas 10 persaingan SemEval 2018 berjudul Menangkap atribut diskriminatif. Sistem terdiri dari kombinasi pendekatan yang mengeksploitasikan pengetahuan secara eksplicit mengenai konsep dalam WordNet dan maklumat yang dikodifikasikan dalam vektor semantik distribusi. Daripada bertujuan untuk prestasi tinggi, kami mengeksplorasi jenis pengetahuan semantik yang terbaik ditangkap oleh kaedah yang berbeza. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa WordNet bersinar pada aras yang berbeza hierarki menangkap banyak atribut yang berkaitan untuk tugas ini. Bergabung dengan mengeksploitasi persamaan dalam perkataan, sumber maklumat ini memberikan hasil terbaik kita. Sistem prestasi terbaik kami ditangkap ke-5 daripada 13 barisan terakhir. Analisis kami memberikan pandangan kepada jenis atribut yang berbeza yang diwakili oleh sumber pengetahuan yang berbeza.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ 10 ടാസ്കിലെ സ്പെയിസ്റ്റ് ടീം നല്\u200dകിയ രണ്ട് സിസ്റ്റം കാണിക്കുന്നു. വിവേ വാര്\u200dഡ്നെറ്റിലെ ആശയങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് പ്രത്യക്ഷമായി കോണ്\u200dഡ് ചെയ്യുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിലുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള സംവ അത്യുന്നതമായ പ്രകടനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി നോക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, ഏതു തരം സെമാന്റിക് അറിവ്  ഈ ജോലിക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത നിലങ്ങളില്\u200d വാര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റ് ഗ്ലോസ് ചെയ്യുന്നു ഈ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്രോതസ്സ് നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവന്നു. ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം 13 അവസാനത്തെ സ്ഥാനത്ത് നിന്ന് 5 മണി നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ അറിവുകളുടെ സ്രോതസ്സുകളാല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളില', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta ż-żewġ sistemi ppreżentati mit-tifsira tat-tim spazjali fil-Kompitu 10 tal-kompetizzjoni SemEval 2018 intitolat Qbid ta’ attributi diskriminatorji. Is-sistemi jikkonsistu f’kombinazzjonijiet ta’ approċċi li jisfruttaw għarfien ikkodifikat espliċitament dwar kunċetti f’WordNet u informazzjoni kkodifikata f’vetturi semantiċi distributtivi. Minflok li nimmiraw għal prestazzjoni għolja, nesploraw liema tip ta’ għarfien semantiku jinqabad bl-aħjar mod b’metodi differenti. Ir-riżultati jindikaw li WordNet jixgħel fuq livelli differenti tal-ġerarkija jaqbad ħafna attributi rilevanti għal dan il-kompitu. Flimkien mal-isfruttar ta’ similaritajiet ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem, dan is-sors ta’ informazzjoni wassal għall-aħjar riżultati tagħna. Is-sistema tagħna bl-aħjar prestazzjoni kienet ikklassifikata fil-ħames minn 13-il grad finali. L-analiżi tagħna tagħti ħarsa lejn it-tipi differenti ta’ attributi rappreżentati minn sorsi differenti ta’ għarfien.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың жарым-жылдық бөлімінің 10- ші тапсырмасындағы бос орын тобының екі жүйелерін көрсетеді. Бұл жүйелер WordNet концепциялары және дистрибуторлық семантикалық векторларда кодталған мәліметтер туралы кодталып қолданылатын адамдардың біріктірімінен тұрады. Жоғары оқиғаларға мақсат берудің орнына, біз қандай семантикалық білім әртүрлі әдістер бойынша жақсы түсірілген екенін зерттейміз. Нәтижелер WordNet иерархияның түрлі деңгейлерінде бірнеше атрибуттарды осы тапсырма үшін қатынайтын атрибуттарды алып тастайды. Бұл мәліметтің көзі біздің ең жақсы нәтижелерімізді жасады. Біздің ең жақсы оқу жүйесіміз 13 соңғы жолдардан 5-ші жолды. Біздің анализиямыз білім көзінің түрлі атрибуттарына арналған түрлі атрибуттарды көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamos dvi sistemos, kurias reikšminga kosmoso komanda pateikė 2018 m. SemEval konkurso 10 užduotyje „Gaunama diskriminacinių požymių“. Sistemas sudaro metodų deriniai, naudojantys aiškiai koduotą žinią apie WordNet sąvokas ir informaciją, koduotą platinamiesiems semantiniams vektoriams. Užuot siekę aukštų rezultatų, mes tiriame, kokios semantinės žinios geriausiai gaunamos taikant skirtingus metodus. Rezultatai rodo, kad WordNet šviečia skirtinguose hierarchijos lygiuose daugelį šiam uždaviniui svarbių požymių. Šis informacijos šaltinis kartu su žodžių įtraukimo panašumo panaudojimu suteikė geriausius rezultatus. Mūsų geriausių rezultatų sistema buvo 5-oji iš 13 paskutinių eilučių. Our analysis yields insights into the different kinds of attributes represented by different sources of knowledge.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2018 оны SemEval өрсөлдөөний 10-р ажлын сансрын багийны хоёр системийг харуулдаг. Эдгээр системүүд WordNet-ийн ойлголтын тухай тодорхой шинжилгээ ашиглаж, хуваарилцааны семантик векторуудын тухай мэдлэг болон мэдээллийг ашиглаж байдаг. Өнгөрсөн үйл ажиллагаанд зориулсан оронд бид ямар төрлийн семантийн мэдлэг өөр аргаар хамгийн сайн баригдсан вэ гэдгийг судалж байна. Үүний үр дүнд WordNet нь энэ үйл ажилд харьцангуй олон өөр хэмжээсүүд дээр харагдаж байгааг харуулдаг. Энэ мэдээллийн эх үүсвэр бидний хамгийн сайн үр дүнг гаргасан. Бидний хамгийн шилдэг үйл ажиллагааны систем 13 төгсгөл хэмжээнээс 5 дахь хэмжээтэй. Бидний шинжилгээнд өөр өөр мэдлэгийн эх үүсвэрээр дүрслэгдсэн өөр өөр өөр өөр өөр өөр өөр харилцааны талаар ойлголт өгдөг.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă cele două sisteme depuse de echipa spațială semnificativă în sarcina 10 a concursului SemEval 2018 intitulat Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii. Sistemele constau în combinații de abordări care exploatează cunoștințe codificate explicit despre conceptele din WordNet și informații codificate în vectori semantici distribuționali. Mai degrabă decât să vizăm performanțe ridicate, explorăm ce fel de cunoștințe semantice sunt cel mai bine capturate prin diferite metode. Rezultatele indică faptul că luciurile WordNet pe diferite niveluri ale ierarhiei captează multe atribute relevante pentru această activitate. În combinație cu exploatarea similarităților încorporate de cuvinte, această sursă de informații a dat cele mai bune rezultate ale noastre. Sistemul nostru cel mai performant s-a clasat pe locul 5 din cele 13 clase finale. Analiza noastră oferă perspective asupra diferitelor tipuri de atribute reprezentate de diferite surse de cunoaștere.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser dei to systema som er sendt av mellomromgruppa i oppgåva 10 av semiEval-konkurransen 2018 som har rett opp diskriminativ attributt. Systema inneheld kombinasjonar av tilnærmingar som eksploderer eksplodert kjenning om konseptar i WordNet og informasjon koda i distribusjonsvektorar. I staden for å måle på høg utvikling, så utforskar vi kva slags semantisk kunnskap er best henta av ulike metoder. Resultatet tyder på at WordNet glasser på ulike nivåar av hierarkia for å henta mange attributtar som er relevante for denne oppgåva. I kombinasjon med bruk av ord innebyggende liknande er denne kjelden av informasjon gjeve våre beste resultat. Våre beste utføringssystemet rangerte femte av 13 sluttrekke. Analysen vårt gjev innsyning i dei ulike typane attributtane representerte av ulike kjelder for kunnskap.', 'si': 'This papers presents the 2 systems transmitted by the means space team in Job 10 of the Halfeval Competition 2018 title Capture discrdiscrdiscrinent Attitude. පද්ධතියේ සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙනවා වර්ඩනෙට් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර්ස් වලින් සංවේදනය වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා ත වෙනස් විදියට අල්ලගන්න බැරි විදියට, අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා කොහොමද සැමැන්තික දැනගන්නේ වෙනස් විදියට අල ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වචන සමග, මේ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියට අන්තිම ප්\u200dරධාන 13 වල 5වෙනි ප්\u200dරධාන කරලා තියෙනවා. අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා වෙනස් වර්ගයක් විශේෂ වර්ගයක් තියෙනවා වෙනස් දැනගැනීමේ ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono dwa systemy zgłoszone przez zespół znaczenia kosmicznego w Zadaniu 10 konkursu SemEval 2018 zatytułowanym Przechwytywanie atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych. Systemy składają się z kombinacji podejść wykorzystujących wyraźnie zakodowaną wiedzę o pojęciach w WordNet oraz informację zakodowaną w dystrybucyjnych wektorach semantycznych. Zamiast dążyć do wysokiej wydajności, badamy, który rodzaj wiedzy semantycznej najlepiej uchwycić za pomocą różnych metod. Wyniki wskazują, że błyszczyki WordNet na różnych poziomach hierarchii przechwytują wiele atrybutów istotnych dla tego zadania. W połączeniu z wykorzystaniem podobieństw osadzania słów, to źródło informacji dało nasze najlepsze rezultaty. Nasz najlepiej wydajny system zajął się piątym miejscem z 13-tego finału. Nasza analiza daje wgląd w różne rodzaje atrybutów reprezentowanych przez różne źródła wiedzy.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja dve sisteme koje je podignuo svemirski tim u zadatku 10 polovičnog natjecanja 2018. godine pod nazivom kapitanja diskriminacijskih atributa. Sistemi se sastavljaju od kombinacija pristupa koja koristi eksplozivno kodirano znanje o konceptima u WordNetu i informacijama kodiranim u distribucijskim semantičkim vektorima. Umesto da ciljamo na visoke funkcije, istražujemo kakvo je semantičko znanje najbolje uhvaćeno različitim metodama. Rezultati ukazuju na to da WordNet širi na različitim nivoima hijerarhije hvata mnoge atribute relevantne za ovaj zadatak. U kombinaciji sa iskorištavanjem reèi ukljuèujuæi sliènosti, ovaj izvor informacija je doneo naš najbolji rezultat. Naš najbolji izvršni sistem je redovao peti od 13 konačnih redova. Naša analiza pruža uvid u različite vrste atributa koje predstavljaju različiti izvori znanja.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa labada nidaam ee loo soo dhiibay kooxda samada ee micneheedu ay ku qoran yihiin qasnadda 10 ee kooxda SemEval ee la yidhaahdo qabsashada takoorida. nidaamka waxaa ka mid ah isku xir qaabab ah oo aad si cad u isticmaaleyso aqoon ku saabsan fikrada WordNet iyo macluumaad ku qoran wadooyinka qaybsan. ayan ka bilaabanayn in aad u baahan tahay, waxaynu baaraynaa nooca aqoonta dabiicadda ah oo ugu wanaagsan qaababka kala duduwan. Abaalka waxaa loola jeedaa in WordNet uu ku faaliyo heerarka kala duwan ee hierarchy ay qabsadaan noocyo badan oo ku saabsan shaqadaas. Isku darsameynta hadalka la isticmaalayo isku mid ah, asalkan macluumaadka ayaa soo saaray resultiyadayada ugu wanaagsan. nidaamkayaga ugu wanaagsanaa ee sameynta waxaa ka mid ahaa shanaad oo fasalka ugu dambeeya. Analyskayagu wuxuu ka soo saaraa aragtida noocyo kala duduwan oo ah noocyo aqoonta kala duduwan.', 'ta': 'இந்த paper presents the two systems submitted by the meaning of the space team in the task 10 of the SemEval competition 2018 entitled to capture discriminatory attributes. Name உயர் செயல்பாட்டிற்கு எதிர்பார்க்கும் பதிலாக, எந்த வகையான பாதிப்பு அறிவு முறைகளால் பிடிக்கப்பட்டது என்பதை  முடிவு இந்த தகவல் மூலம் எங்கள் சிறந்த முடிவுகளை கொடுத்தது. எங்கள் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் அமைப்பு 13 இறுதி வரிசையில் 5வது வரிசையில் உள்ளது. எங்கள் ஆய்வு அறிவு மூலத்தில் குணங்களை வேறு வகையான குணங்களில் கொண்டு வருகிறது.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar de två system som lämnats in av meningsutrymmesteamet i uppgift 10 i SemEval-tävlingen 2018 med titeln Fånga diskriminerande attribut. Systemen består av kombinationer av tillvägagångssätt som utnyttjar explicit kodad kunskap om begrepp i WordNet och information kodad i distributionsmässiga semantiska vektorer. Istället för att sikta på hög prestanda undersöker vi vilken typ av semantisk kunskap som bäst fångas med olika metoder. Resultaten indikerar att WordNet-glans på olika nivåer i hierarkin fångar många attribut som är relevanta för den här uppgiften. I kombination med att utnyttja ordinbäddande likheter gav denna informationskälla våra bästa resultat. Vårt bäst presterande system rankades 5:e av 13 slutliga rankningar. Vår analys ger insikter i de olika typerna av attribut som representeras av olika kunskapskällor.', 'ur': 'This paper presents the two systems submitted by the meaning of space team in Task 10 of the SemEval competition 2018 entitled Capturing discriminative attributes. سیستموں میں ایسے طریقے کی پیدائش ہیں جو واضح طور پر علم کے بارے میں مشخص کر رہے ہیں WordNet میں اور تقسیم سیمانٹی ویکتروں میں سیدھی معلومات کی پیدائش کی جاتی ہیں۔ بلکہ عملکرد کے لئے مطابق ہے، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ کس طرح سیمانتی علم بہترین طریقے سے پکڑے جاتے ہیں۔ نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ WordNet اس کام کے لئے بہت سی آبریٹوں کو پکڑتا ہے جو مختلف سطح پر گلوس ہوتا ہے. یہ معلومات کا سورج ہمارے سب سے بہترین نتیجے دے رہا ہے۔ ہمارے سب سے بہترین نمایش نظام پر پانچویں درجے سے ۱۳ پانچویں درجے تھے۔ ہماری تحلیل مختلف طریقوں میں مشورت دیتا ہے جو مختلف علم کے منبع سے نشان دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa esa SemEval Tashqi 10 yildagi ikkita tizim (SemEval) vazifani olib tashlab olish mumkin. Name Bu ta'sirni tasavvur qilishni tasavvur qilishidan tasavvur qilamiz, biz har xil usullar bilan qanchalik semantik bilimni o'rganamiz. Name Bu maʼlumot manbasi bizning eng yaxshi natijalarimizni bajardi. Bizning eng yaxshi bajarish tizimimiz 13 ta oxirgi darajadagi 5 marta ajratilgan. Analysimizning ko'rinishimiz o'zgartiriladi, har hil ta'lim manbalar bilan boshqa shakllarga ko'rinadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu hai hệ thống được gửi bởi nhóm vũ trụ nghĩa là "Task 10" của cuộc thi Semkhai thác phần thưởng giá trị riêng biệt. Các hệ thống gồm các kết hợp các phương pháp khai thác hiểu biết được mã hóa trực tiếp về các khái niệm trên WordNet và thông tin được mã hóa trong các cỗ máy phân phối/ Thay vì hướng tới hiệu suất cao, chúng ta tìm hiểu loại kiến thức ngữ pháp nào thích hợp nhất với các phương pháp khác nhau. Kết quả cho thấy WordNet bóng loáng ở các cấp độ phân cấp khác nhau trong hệ thống ghi lại rất nhiều khả năng thuộc về nhiệm vụ này. Kết hợp với việc khai thác những điểm tương đồng, nguồn thông tin này đã có kết quả tốt nhất. Hệ thống thành công tốt nhất xếp hạng thứ năm trên cấp III Phân tích của chúng tôi cung cấp hiểu biết về các loại thuộc tính khác nhau đại diện bởi các nguồn kiến thức khác nhau.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer de to systemer, som meningsrumteamet har indsendt i opgave 10 i SemEval konkurrencen 2018 med titlen Capturing diskriminerende attributes. Systemerne består af kombinationer af tilgange, der udnytter eksplicit kodet viden om begreber i WordNet og information kodet i distributionsmæssige semantiske vektorer. I stedet for at sigte efter høj ydeevne undersøger vi, hvilken slags semantisk viden der bedst fanges af forskellige metoder. Resultaterne indikerer, at WordNet-glans på forskellige niveauer af hierarkiet fanger mange attributter, der er relevante for denne opgave. I kombination med at udnytte ord integrering ligheder gav denne kilde til information vores bedste resultater. Vores bedst ydende system rangerede 5. ud af 13 endelige rækker. Vores analyse giver indsigt i de forskellige former for egenskaber repræsenteret af forskellige kilder til viden.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя двете системи, представени от екипа на космическото значение в Задача 10 на конкурса "Заснемане на дискриминационни атрибути". Системите се състоят от комбинации от подходи, използващи изрично кодирани знания за понятията в WordNet и информация кодирана в дистрибуционни семантични вектори. Вместо да се стремим към висока производителност, ние изследваме какъв вид семантично знание е най-добре уловено чрез различни методи. Резултатите показват, че гланцовете на различни нива на йерархията улавят много атрибути, свързани с тази задача. В комбинация с използването на прилики с думи, този източник на информация даде най-добрите ни резултати. Най-добре представящата ни система се класира на 5-то място от 13 финални класации. Нашият анализ дава представа за различните видове атрибути, представени от различни източници на знания.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja dvije sustave koje je podnio svemirski tim u zadatku 10 polovičnog natjecanja 2018. godine pod nazivom prihvaćanja diskriminacijskih atributa. Sistemi se sastoje od kombinacija pristupa koji koriste jasno kodirane znanje o konceptima u WordNetu i informacijama kodiranim u distribucijskim semantičkim vektorima. Umjesto cilja za visoke funkcije, istražujemo kakvo je semantičko znanje najbolje uhvaćeno različitim metodama. Rezultati ukazuju na to da WordNet širi na različitim razinama hierarhije hvata mnoge atribute relevantne za ovaj zadatak. U kombinaciji s korištenjem riječi uključujući sličnosti, ovaj izvor informacija donio je naš najbolji rezultat. Naš najbolji izvršni sustav je redovao 5 od 13 konačnih redova. Naša analiza pruža uvid u različite vrste atributa koje predstavljaju različiti izvori znanja.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert de twee systemen die zijn ingediend door het betekenisruimteteam in Task 10 van de SemEval competitie 2018 getiteld Capturing discriminatieve attributes. De systemen bestaan uit combinaties van benaderingen die gebruik maken van expliciet gecodeerde kennis over concepten in WordNet en informatie gecodeerd in distributionele semantische vectoren. In plaats van te streven naar hoge prestaties, onderzoeken we welk soort semantische kennis het beste kan worden vastgelegd met verschillende methoden. De resultaten geven aan dat WordNet glossen op verschillende niveaus van de hiërarchie veel attributen vastleggen die relevant zijn voor deze taak. In combinatie met het benutten van woordinbedding overeenkomsten leverde deze informatiebron onze beste resultaten op. Ons best presterende systeem werd 5e van de 13-finale. Onze analyse geeft inzicht in de verschillende soorten attributen die worden vertegenwoordigd door verschillende kennisbronnen.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag werden die beiden Systeme vorgestellt, die das Bedeutungsraum-Team in Task 10 des SemEval-Wettbewerbs 2018 mit dem Titel Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute eingereicht hat. Die Systeme bestehen aus Kombinationen von Ansätzen, die explizit kodiertes Wissen über Konzepte in WordNet und Informationen in verteilten semantischen Vektoren nutzen. Anstatt eine hohe Leistung anzustreben, untersuchen wir, welche Art von semantischem Wissen am besten mit verschiedenen Methoden erfasst werden kann. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass WordNet Glosses auf verschiedenen Hierarchieebenen viele Attribute erfassen, die für diese Aufgabe relevant sind. In Kombination mit der Ausnutzung von Wort-Einbettung Ähnlichkeiten lieferte diese Informationsquelle unsere besten Ergebnisse. Unser leistungsstärkstes System belegte den fünften Platz von den 13-Endplatzierungen. Unsere Analyse liefert Einblicke in die verschiedenen Arten von Attributen, die durch unterschiedliche Wissensquellen repräsentiert werden.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ دو سیستم را به عنوان تیم فضایی در مسابقه ۱۰ از مسابقه نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ که به عنوان دستگیری خصوصیات جدا جدا می\u200cشود نشان می\u200cدهد. سیستم\u200cها از ترکیب\u200cهای روش\u200cهای استفاده از دانش\u200cهای مشخصی درباره\u200cی مفهوم\u200cهای WordNet و اطلاعات که در ویکتورهای semantic تقسیم شده\u200cاند استفاده می\u200cکنند. به جای هدف عملکرد بالا، ما کشف می کنیم که کدام نوع دانش semantic بهترین روش\u200cهای مختلف گرفته شده است. نتایج نشان می\u200cدهند که WordNet در سطح مختلف طبقه\u200cای از طبقه\u200cای از طبقه\u200cای بسیاری از ویژه\u200cهای مربوط به این کار می\u200cگیرد. این منبع اطلاعات بهترین نتیجه\u200cهای ما را به وجود آورد. بهترین سیستم اجرای ما پنجمین از ۱۳ درجه نهایی بود. تحلیل ما به نوع گونه\u200cهای متفاوتی که توسط منبع\u200cهای دانش مختلف معرفی می\u200cشوند، مشاهده می\u200cکند.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan dua sistem yang dihantar oleh tim ruang angkasa yang berarti dalam Tugas 10 dari kompetisi SemEval 2018 berjudul Menangkap atribut diskriminatif. Sistem ini terdiri dari kombinasi pendekatan yang mengeksploitasi pengetahuan secara eksplicit terkode tentang konsep dalam WordNet dan informasi terkode dalam vektor semantis distribusi. Rather than aiming for high performance, we explore which kind of semantic knowledge is best captured by different methods.  Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa WordNet bersinar pada tingkat yang berbeda dari hierarki menangkap banyak atribut yang relevan untuk tugas ini. Berkombinasi dengan mengeksploitasi kesamaan kata-kata, sumber informasi ini memberikan hasil terbaik kita. Sistem prestasi terbaik kami ditangkap ke-5 dari 13 derajat terakhir. Analisi kami memberikan penglihatan ke jenis atribut yang berbeda yang diwakili oleh sumber pengetahuan yang berbeda.', 'ko': "본고는 의미공간팀이 2018년 SemEval 경연 미션 10인'포획 변별 속성'에 제출한 두 시스템을 소개한다.이 시스템은WordNet에서 개념한 현식 인코딩 지식과 분포식 의미 벡터 인코딩 정보를 활용하는 방법으로 조합되었다.우리는 고성능을 목표로 하지 않고 어떤 의미 지식이 서로 다른 방법으로 얻기에 가장 적합한지 탐색한다.그 결과WordNet은 차원 구조의 서로 다른 차원에서gloss가 이 작업과 관련된 많은 속성을 포착했다.단어가 삽입된 유사성을 결합하면 이 정보원은 우리의 가장 좋은 결과를 만들어 낸다.우리가 가장 잘 표현한 시스템은 13개의 최종 랭킹에서 5위에 올랐다.우리의 분석은 서로 다른 지식의 출처가 대표하는 서로 다른 속성을 깊이 이해할 수 있다.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha mifumo miwili iliyotolewa na maana ya timu ya space katika Task 10 ya mashindano ya SemEval mwaka 2018 yenye kichwa cha kuchukua vifaa vya ubaguzi. Mfumo unajumuisha mchanganyiko wa mbinu zinazotumia maarifa ya wazi ilijumuisha maarifa kuhusu dhana za WordNet na taarifa zilizojumuisha katika vector za sekunde za mchanganyiko. Badala ya lengo la kuendelea ufanisi mkubwa, tunachunguza namna gani maarifa ya kijinsia inafanikiwa zaidi na njia tofauti. The results indicate that WordNet glosses on different levels of the hierarchy capture many attributes relevant for this task.  Kwa mujibu wa matumizi ya neno linaloweka sawa, chanzo hiki cha habari kilileta matokeo yetu bora. Mfumo wetu bora wa kufanya kazi ulikuwa na rangi ya tano kati ya daraja 13 za mwisho. Uchambuzi wetu unatoa mitazamo katika aina tofauti tofauti zilizowakilishwa na vyanzo mbalimbali vya maarifa.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet dy sistemet e paraqitura nga ekipi hapësiror që do të thotë në detyrën 10 të konkurrencës SemEval 2018 me titull Kapja e atributeve diskriminuese. Sistemet përbëhen nga kombinimet e qasjeve që shfrytëzojnë njohuritë e koduara eksplicitisht rreth koncepteve në WordNet dhe informacionit të koduar në vektorët semantik shpërndarës. Në vend që të synojmë për shfaqje të lartë, ne eksplorojmë se cili lloj njohurie semantike është më i miri të kapur me metoda të ndryshme. Rezultatet tregojnë se WordNet shkëlqen në nivele të ndryshme të hierarkisë kapin shumë atribute të rëndësishme për këtë detyrë. Në kombinim me shfrytëzimin e ngjashmërive të përfshirjes së fjalëve, ky burim i informacionit dha rezultatet tona më të mira. Sistemi ynë më i mirë performues u rendit i pesti nga 13 rendit përfundimtarë. Analiza jonë jep pamje në llojet e ndryshme të atributeve të përfaqësuar nga burime të ndryshme të njohurive.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የስፋት 10 ተቃውሞ በ2018 የSemEval ትምህርት የተደረገውን የስርዓት አካባቢ የስርዓት ተቃውሞ የሁለቱን ስርዓቶች ያቀርባል፡፡ The systems consist of combinations of approaches exploiting explicitly encoded knowledge about concepts in WordNet and information encoded in distributional semantic vectors.  ከፍተኛ ስርዓት ለማድረግ ከመፈለግ ይልቅ ምን ዓይነት እውቀት በተለየ ልዩ ልማድ እንደሚያሰኘው እናውቃለን፡፡ ውጤቶቹ የWordNet አካባቢ በተለየ ደረጃዎች ላይ በሚያደግፉ የዚህን ስራ የተጠቃሚ ብዙ ምርጫዎችን እንዲያዝዛቸው ያሳያል፡፡ በተለያዩ ቃላት በመጠቀም በተለያዩ ይህ የመረጃ ምንጭ የተሻለ ፍሬዎችን አቀረበ፡፡ ከ13 የመጨረሻው ደረጃዎች 5ኛ ደረጃ ውስጥ ነው፡፡ ትምህርታችን በተለዩ እውቀት ምንጮች የተለየ የልዩ ዓይነት ልዩ አካላትን ያሳያል፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 2018-nji ýyldaky SemEval atipýasynyň 10-nji sany ýerleşýän ýerleşýän iki sistemini görkezýär. Bu sistemler WordNet ve bölüm semantik vektörlerinde kodlanmış bilim hakkında kullanan yaklaştırmalar birleşmesidir. Yüksek ukyplary üçin amaçlamagymyzdan, beýleki yönlerde nähili semantik bilim gowy görnüşinden tutulandygyny gözleýäris. Netijeler WordNet hierarhiýanyň farklı derejesinde birnäçe hasaplanyň bu zada gerekli hasaplanyny çekip barýandygyny görkez. Täzelikleriň daşary sözleri ulanmak bilen birleşende, bu malümatyň çeşmesi biziň iň gowy netijelerimizi berdi. Biziň iň gowy tanyş sistemimiz 13-nji derejeden 5-nji derejä boldy. Biziň analyzymyz bilim çeşitli çeşmeleri tarapyndan meňzeş hasaplamalaryň daşynda düşünjeleri getirir.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier voorstel die twee stelsels wat deur die betekening van spasieteam in Taak 10 van die semiEval-samekoms 2018 aangestel word, wat die diskriminasiewe eienskappe vervang het. Die stelsels bestaan van kombinasies van toegange wat uitgelyk gekodeerde kennis oor konsepte in WordNet en inligting gekodeer in verspreidingssemantiese vektore. In plaas as van die doel van hoë prestasie, ondersoek ons watter soort semantiese kennis is beste gevang deur verskillende metodes. Die resultate wys dat WordNet glans op verskillende vlakke van die hierarkie vervang baie eienskappe wat relevant vir hierdie taak is. In kombinasie met uitgebruik van woord wat ingesluit gelykenisse, het hierdie bron van inligting ons beste resultate gegee. Ons beste uitvoerde stelsel rangeer 5de uit 13 finale ranke. Ons analisie gee insigte in die verskillende soorte eienskappe wat deur verskillende bronne van kennis verteenwoordig is.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է երկու համակարգերը, որոնք ներկայացվել են տիեզերական թիմի կողմից 2018 թվականի ՍեմԵվալ մրցակցության 10-րդ հանձնարարության մեջ, որը կոչվում է «Բռնել խտրականության առանձնահա Այս համակարգերը կազմված են WordNet-ի գաղափարների մասին բացահայտորեն կոդավորված գիտելիքներ օգտագործող մոտեցումների համակցումներից և բացահայտորեն կոդավորված տեղեկություններից: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչ տեսակի սեմանտիկ գիտելիքներ են լավագույնս բռնվում տարբեր մեթոդներով: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ WordNet-ը լուսավորում է հիերարխիայի տարբեր մակարդակներում, ընդունում է շատ առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք կարևոր են այս խնդրի համար: Այս տեղեկատվության աղբյուրն արտադրեց մեր լավագույն արդյունքները: Մեր լավագույն արդյունավետ համակարգը վերջնական 13-ից 5-րդ դասակարգ էր: Մեր վերլուծությունը ներկայացնում է տարբեր տիպի առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք ներկայացված են գիտելիքի տարբեր աղբյուրներով:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি সেমইভাল প্রতিযোগিতার ১০ টি কাজের মানে স্পেস টিম দুটি সিস্টেম প্রদান করেছে, যার শিরোনাম বৈষম্যের বৈষম্যের বৈষম্য সিস্টেমের মধ্যে স্পষ্টভাবে ওয়ার্ডনেটের ধারণা সম্পর্কে জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করা যাচ্ছে এবং বিতরণের সেম্পেন্টিক ভেক্টরে তথ্য বিতরণ করা  উচ্চকর্মের উদ্দেশ্যের চেষ্টা করার পরিবর্তে আমরা খুঁজে বের করি যে কোন ধরনের সেম্যান্টিক জ্ঞান বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতি  ফলাফল নির্দেশ করে যে ওয়ার্ডনেট এই কাজের জন্য অনেক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর ভিন্ন পর্যায়ে গ্লাস করছে। এই তথ্যের উৎস আমাদের সেরা ফলাফল দিয়েছে। আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনী সিস্টেম ১৩ শেষ সারির মধ্যে ৫তম রেখেছে। আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ বিভিন্ন ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করে জ্ঞানের বিভিন্ন উৎসের প্রতিনি', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval müharibəsində uzay takımının ifadə edildiyi iki sistemi göstərir. Sistemlər WordNet və bölünmə semantik vektörlərdə kodlanmış məlumatlar haqqında açıq-aydın kodlanmış bilgi ilə istifadə edilən yaxınlıqların birlikləri ilə birlikdə idilər. Yüksek performanslıq məqsədilə gəlmək yerinə, hansı semantik bilgi müxtəlif metodlar ilə yaxınlıq edildiyini keşfetirik. Sonuçlar, WordNet hierarhiyanın müxtəlif səviyyələrində bir çox xüsusiyyətləri bu işə məxsus edir. Bu məlumatın mənbəsi bizim ən yaxşı sonuçlarımızı verir. Bizim ən yaxşı müəyyən sistemimiz 13 dərəcələrdən 5-ci dərəcə idi. Bizim analizimiz müxtəlif bilimin mənbələri ilə təşkil edilmiş müxtəlif qüdrətlərə nəzər verir.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja dva sustava podignuta svemirskim tim u zadatku 10 natjecanja za pola Evala 2018. godine pod nazivom kapitanja diskriminacijskih atributa. Sistemi se sastavljaju od kombinacija pristupa koji koriste jasno kodirane znanje o konceptima u WordNetu i informacijama kodiranim u distribucijskim semantičkim vektorima. Umjesto cilja za visoke performanse, istražujemo kakvo je semantičko znanje najbolje uhvaćeno različitim metodama. Rezultati ukazuju na to da WordNet širi na različitim nivoima hijerarhije hvata mnoge atribute relevantne za ovaj zadatak. U kombinaciji sa korištenjem riječi uključujući sličnosti, ovaj izvor informacija donio je naš najbolji rezultat. Naš najbolji izvršni sistem je određen 5. iz 13 konačnih redova. Naša analiza pruža uvid u različite vrste atributa koje predstavljaju različiti izvori znanja.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta els dos sistemes presentats per l'equip espacial significatiu de la tasca 10 de la competició SemEval 2018 titulada Captura d'atributs discriminatoris. The systems consist of combinations of approaches exploiting explicitly encoded knowledge about concepts in WordNet and information encoded in distributional semantic vectors.  En comptes de mirar a un alt rendiment, explorem quin tipus de coneixement semàntic és el millor capturat per diferents mètodes. Els resultats indican que WordNet brilla en diferents nivells de la jerarquia capturan molts atributs pertinents per a aquesta tasca. En combinació amb l'explotació de similituds d'incorporació de paraules, aquesta font d'informació va donar els nostres millors resultats. El nostre sistema de millors resultats es va classificar en cinc de cada 13 nivells finals. La nostra anàlisi dona insights sobre els diferents tipus d'atributs representats per diferents fonts de coneixement.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje dva systémy předložené významným vesmírným týmem v Úkolu 10 soutěže SemEval 2018 s názvem Zachycení diskriminačních atributů. Systémy se skládají z kombinací přístupů využívajících explicitně kódovaných znalostí o pojmech ve WordNet a informací kódovaných v distribučních sémantických vektorech. Namísto toho, abychom usilovali o vysoký výkon, zkoumáme, který druh sémantických znalostí je nejlépe zachycen různými metodami. Výsledky ukazují, že lesky WordNet na různých úrovních hierarchie zachycují mnoho atributů relevantních pro tento úkol. V kombinaci s využitím podobností vkládání slov, tento zdroj informací přinesl naše nejlepší výsledky. Náš nejlépe výkonný systém byl pátý ze třináctého finále. Naše analýza poskytuje pohled na různé druhy atributů reprezentovaných různými zdroji znalostí.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse kahte süsteemi, mille tähendusruumi meeskond esitas SemEval 2018. aasta konkursi ülesandes 10 "Diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamine". Süsteemid koosnevad lähenemisviiside kombinatsioonidest, mis kasutavad selgesõnaliselt kodeeritud teadmisi WordNeti kontseptsioonidest ja jaotussemantilistes vektorites kodeeritud teavet. Selle asemel, et püüda saavutada kõrget jõudlust, uurime, milliseid semantilisi teadmisi erinevate meetoditega kõige paremini koguda. Tulemused näitavad, et WordNet läiked hierarhia erinevatel tasanditel hõlmavad palju selle ülesande jaoks olulisi atribuute. Koos sõna sisaldavate sarnasuste kasutamisega andis see teabeallikas meie parimad tulemused. Meie parimate tulemustega süsteem oli 13 viimasest järjestusest viies. Meie analüüs annab ülevaate erinevatest omadustest, mida esindavad erinevad teadmiste allikad.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään merkityksen avaruustiimin esittämät kaksi järjestelmää SemEval-kilpailun tehtävässä 10 Capturing discriminative attributes. Järjestelmät koostuvat lähestymistapojen yhdistelmistä, joissa hyödynnetään nimenomaisesti koodattua tietoa WordNetin käsitteistä ja jakelusemanttisiin vektoreihin koodattua tietoa. Korkean suorituskyvyn sijaan tutkimme, millaista semanttista tietoa eri menetelmillä saadaan parhaiten talteen. Tulokset osoittavat, että WordNet-glossit hierarkian eri tasoilla sisältävät monia tehtävään liittyviä määritteitä. Yhdessä sanan upottamisen yhtäläisyyksien hyödyntämisen kanssa tämä tietolähde tuotti parhaat tulokset. Parhaiten suoriutuva järjestelmämme sijoittui viidenneksi 13 viimeisestä sijoituksesta. Analyysimme tuottaa oivalluksia erilaisista ominaisuuksista, joita eri tietolähteet edustavat.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki bakal ngewehhu sistem durung sing nyimpen ning acara kosong mungkin task 10 ning atiribusi seminval ning atiribusi sing birjane Capturan Sistem sistem nduwe akeh komunikasi dadi kapan kanggo kelas nang rakont akeh spisa batasan karo kelangan kelangan kelangan kelangan kanggo kelangan kelangan kelangan kelangan kelangan karo kelangan kelangan kelangan Terus ono nggalakno sing luwih akeh operasi nggawe, awak dhéwé isih luwih apik sematik matan sing luwih apik dhéwé. Rejaling Anyone Awakdhéwé sing paling nggambar kuwi tanggal 5 sekang, 13 sekang tanggal. Ndeleksé awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang kanggo kalagayan Attribute sing mengko perkaraé awak dhéwé.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה את שתי המערכות שנשלחו על ידי קבוצת החלל המשמעותית במשימה 10 של תחרות SemEval 2018 בשם Capturing discriminative attributes. המערכות מכילות שילובים של גישות שמניצלות ידע מוצפן באופן ברור על רעיונות ב WordNet ומידע מוצפן בוקטורים סמנטיים פיצועים. במקום למטרה להופעה גבוהה, אנחנו חוקרים איזה מין ידע סמנטי נתפס הכי טוב בשיטות שונות. התוצאות מצביעות כי WordNet זוהר ברמות שונות של הייררכיה לכלוא הרבה תכונות רלוונטיים למשימה זו. בתוך שילוב לנצל דמיונות של מילים, מקור המידע הזה הביא את התוצאות הטובות ביותר שלנו. מערכת ההופעה הטובה ביותר שלנו הגיעה ל-5 מתוך 13 מערכות אחרונות. הניתוח שלנו נותן תובנות לסוגים שונים של תכונות מייצגים על ידי מקורות שונים של ידע.', 'ha': 'Wannan takardan na bãyar da kayan biyu na\'urar da aka shigar da team ɗin space in Tafiyar 10 of the Semeval competitin 2018 titled "Grabbing Discimitive attitudes." Systemi na kamfata da komai masu yin amfani da ilmi kodi kodi bayani na shiryoyin ayuka da ke cikin WDNet da information na kodi cikin shiryoyi na semantic. Babu kalmar ta yi amfani da mafiya sauri, ko ko ko wanne ne ke fi kyãwon sanki a cikin hanyoyin dabam-dabam. Mataimakin na nuna cewa wordNet yana ƙari cikin daraja daban-daban na girgiza masu yawa na da amfani da wa wannan aikin. Ga koma da yin amfani da maganar da ke embedded in misãlai, wannan source of information ya ga fassararmu mafiya kyau. Tsarinmu mafi kyãwo da za\'a danganta 5th daga darajõji 13 na ƙarshen. AnalyyinMu ya fitar da gannai cikin wasu misãlai dabam-dabam da aka sanar da su daga sourcen ilmi.', 'sk': 'V prispevku sta predstavljena dva sistema, ki ju je predložila ekipa pomenskega vesolja v nalogi 10 tekmovanja SemEval 2018 z naslovom Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov. Sistemi so sestavljeni iz kombinacij pristopov, ki izkoriščajo eksplicitno kodirano znanje o konceptih v WordNetu in informacijah kodiranih v distribucijskih semantičnih vektorjih. Namesto da bi si prizadevali za visoko zmogljivost, raziskujemo, katero semantično znanje je najbolje zajeti z različnimi metodami. Rezultati kažejo, da WordNet glosi na različnih ravneh hierarhije zajemajo številne atribute, pomembne za to opravilo. V kombinaciji z izkoriščanjem podobnosti besed, ki vsebujejo podobnosti, je ta vir informacij prinesel naše najboljše rezultate. Naš najboljši sistem se je uvrstil na 5. mesto med 13 končnimi lestvicami. Naša analiza prinaša vpogled v različne vrste atributov, ki jih predstavljajo različni viri znanja.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྡན་གྱི་དབང་ཆ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་པའི་མ་ལག་གཉིས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་སྟོན The systems consist of combinations of approaches exploiting explicitly encoded knowledge about concepts in WordNet and information encoded in distributional semantic vectors. འུ་ཅག་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ལྡན་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་མེད་པར། ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ཟེར་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཤེས་ཚོས་གང གནད་སྡུད་འབྲས་བ་དེའི་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཚད་མི་འདྲ་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྣམས་བཞག་ཡོད་པ མཉམ་ལས་ཕན་ཚུལ་འདྲ་བརྗོད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་མཉམ་དུ་བཅུག་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཁྱེར་སྟངས་ལྡན་མཇུག་གི་གྲལ་ཐིག་གསུམ་ཅིག་གཟའ་འགོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སོ་སོའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཅིག་མཚོན་པའི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་མ་འདྲ་བ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'CitiusNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : The Use of Transparent Distributional Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'ar': 'CitiusNLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: استخدام نماذج توزيع شفافة وسياقات بارزة للتمييز بين سمات الكلمات', 'es': 'CitiusNLP en Semeval-2018 Tarea 10: El uso de modelos distribucionales transparentes y contextos destacados para discriminar los atributos de las palabras', 'fr': "CitiusNLP au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 10\xa0: L'utilisation de modèles de distribution transparents et de contextes saillants pour discriminer les attributs des mots", 'pt': 'CitiusNLP no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: O uso de modelos distributivos transparentes e contextos salientes para discriminar atributos de palavras', 'ja': 'CitiusNLP at SemEval -2018 Task 10: The Use of Transparent Distributional Models and Salient Context to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर CitiusNLP: पारदर्शी वितरण मॉडल और मुख्य संदर्भों का उपयोग वर्ड विशेषताओं में भेदभाव करने के लिए', 'ru': 'Задача 10: Использование прозрачных моделей распределения и явных контекстов для различения словесных атрибутов', 'zh': 'CitiusNLPŚú®SemEval-2018Śä°10:śėéŚłÉšłäšłčśĖášĽ•ŚąęŚćēŤĮćśÄß', 'ga': 'CitiusNLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Samhlacha Dáilte Trédhearcacha agus Comhthéacsanna Soiléire a Úsáid chun Tréithe Focal a Idirdhealú', 'hu': 'CitiusNLP a SemEval-2018 10. feladat: Átlátszó elosztási modellek és súlyos kontextusok használata a szóattribútumok megkülönböztetésére', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Η χρήση διαφανών μοντέλων διανομής και ευδιάκριτων πλαισίων για τη διάκριση χαρακτηριστικών λέξεων', 'ka': 'CitiusNLP semiEval-2018 Task 10: Transparent Distributional Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'lt': 'CitiusNLP pagal SemEval-2018 užduotį 10: Skaidrių paskirstymo modelių ir saldžių kontekstų naudojimas diskriminuojant žodžių požymius', 'it': "CitiusNLP a SemEval-2018 Task 10: L'uso di modelli distributivi trasparenti e contesti salienti per discriminare gli attributi delle parole", 'mk': 'CitiusNLP на SemEval-2018 задача 10: Користење транспарентни дистрибуционални модели и слатки контексти за дискриминација на зборовите атрибути', 'kk': 'CitiusNLP at semiEval-2018 Task 10: The Use of Transparent Distribution Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'ms': 'City', 'mt': 'CitiusNLP f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 10: L-Użu ta’ Mudelli ta’ Distribuzzjoni Trasparenti u Kuntest Saljenti għad-Diskriminazzjoni tal-Attributi tal-Kliem', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10- ലെ സിറ്റിയുസ് NLP: വാക്കിന്റെ ഗുണഗണങ്ങളെ വിവിധേയമാക്കുവാനുള്ള ഉപയോഗിക്കുക', 'mn': 'CitiusNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: The Use of Transparent Distribution Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'no': 'CitiusNLP at semiEval-2018 Task 10: Bruk gjennomsiktige distribusjonsmodular og salient kontekstar til diskriminasjon av ordattributtar', 'pl': 'CitiusNLP w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Wykorzystanie przejrzystych modeli dystrybucyjnych i wyraźnych kontekstów do dyskryminacji atrybutów słowa', 'so': 'CitiusNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: The Use of the Transparent Distribution Models and Salient Contents to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'ro': 'CitiusNLP la SemEval-2018 Task 10: Utilizarea unor modele de distribuție transparente și a unor contexte saliente pentru a discrimina atributele cuvintelor', 'sr': 'CitiusNLP na zadatku 10: Korištenje transparentnih distribucijskih modela i sadržljivih konteksta diskriminacijskim atributima riječi', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 10- ல் CitiusNLP: Transparent Distribution Models and Salient Contents to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: The use of Transparent Distribution Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'sv': 'CitiusNLP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Användning av transparenta distributionsmodeller och saliga kontexter för att diskriminera ordattribut', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 vazifa 10: Shaffof Distribution Models and Contents to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'vi': 'Thành phố NLP tại SemEvol-208 Task 10: Việc sử dụng các Chế độ phân chia nhanh nhanh mẹ và các cuộc cạnh tranh Salient to discrimentate từ Attracts', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Използването на прозрачни разпределителни модели и съществени контексти за дискриминация на атрибутите на словото', 'da': 'CitiusNLP på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Brug af gennemsigtige distributionsmodeller og vigtige kontekster til at diskriminere ordattributter', 'hr': 'CitiusNLP na zadatku 10: Korištenje transparentnih distribucijskih modela i pristojnih konteksta diskriminacijskim atributima riječi', 'nl': 'CitiusNLP op SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Het gebruik van transparante distributiemodellen en opvallende contexten om woordattributen te discrimineren', 'de': 'CitiusNLP auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Der Einsatz transparenter Verteilungsmodelle und aussagekräftiger Kontexte zur Unterscheidung von Wortattributen', 'ko': 'CitiusNLP가SemEval-18년에서의 작업 10: 투명 분포 모델과 현저한 상하문으로 단어 속성 구분', 'id': 'CitiusNLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Penggunaan Model Distribusi Transparent dan Konteks Salient untuk Diskriminasi Atribut Kata', 'fa': 'CitiusNLP در ماموریت ۱۰: استفاده از مدل\u200cهای پراکنده\u200cای شگفت\u200cانگیز و محیط\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای برای ویژه\u200cهای کلمه جدایی\u200cکننده', 'sw': 'CitiusNLP katika SemEval-2018 Task 10: Utumiaji wa Modela za Usambazaji wa Uwazi na Mitandao ya Uhamiaji wa Kupambana na Tamko la Hadithi', 'sq': 'CitiusNLP në SemEval-2018 Task 10: Përdorimi i modeleve transparente shpërndarëse dhe konteksteve të shëmtuara për të diskriminuar atributet e fjalëve', 'tr': 'CitiusNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: The Use of Transparent Distributional Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'af': 'CitiusNLP by SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Die Gebruik van Transparent Distribusionele Modelle en Salient Konteks na Diskriminasie Woord Attribute', 'am': 'CitiusNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: The Use of Transparent Distributional Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'hy': 'Քաղաքարը', 'az': 'CitiusNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: The Use of Transparent Distribution Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ১০-এ সিটিউএনএলপি: শব্দের বৈষম্য বৈষম্যের জন্য স্বচ্ছতা বিতরণ মডেল এবং স্বাভাবিক বিষয়বস্তুর ব্যবহার', 'ca': 'CitiusNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: The Use of Transparent Distributional Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes', 'cs': 'Úkol 10: Použití transparentních distribučních modelů a výrazných kontextů k rozlišování slovních atributů', 'bs': 'CitiusNLP na zadatku 10: Korištenje transparentnih distribucijskih modela i sadržljivih konteksta diskriminacijskim atributima riječi', 'et': 'CitiusNLP SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 10: Läbipaistvate jaotusmudelite ja oluliste kontekstide kasutamine sõna atribuutide diskrimineerimiseks', 'fi': 'CitiusNLP SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Avointen jakelumallien ja merkittävien kontekstien käyttö sanaattribuuttien syrjintään', 'jv': 'Status NLP at semi-2008 task 10: The use of Darkarent Distribution model and Alient context to Diskrim Word Attribute', 'sk': 'CitiusNLP na SemEval-2018 Naloga 10: Uporaba transparentnih distribucijskih modelov in pomembnih kontekstov za diskriminacijo besednih atributov', 'he': 'CitiusNLP ב SemEval-2018 משימה 10: השימוש של דוגמנים פיצועים ברורים וקונקסטים מלוכלכים', 'ha': 'CitiusNLP at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 10: Use the Use of Translate Models and Salent Content to Discern words AttAttAttities', 'bo': 'CitiusNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: The Use of Transparent Distributional Models and Salient Contexts to Discriminate Word Attributes'}
{'en': 'This article describes the unsupervised strategy submitted by the CitiusNLP team to the SemEval 2018 Task 10, a task which consists of predict whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two other words. Our strategy relies on the correspondence between discriminative attributes and relevant contexts of a word. More precisely, the method uses transparent distributional models to extract salient contexts of words which are identified as discriminative attributes. The system performance reaches about 70 % accuracy when it is applied on the development dataset, but its accuracy goes down (63 %) on the official test dataset.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه المقالة الإستراتيجية غير الخاضعة للإشراف التي قدمها فريق CitiusNLP إلى SemEval 2018 Task 10 ، وهي مهمة تتكون من توقع ما إذا كانت الكلمة سمة تمييزية بين كلمتين أخريين. تعتمد استراتيجيتنا على المراسلات بين السمات التمييزية والسياقات ذات الصلة للكلمة. بتعبير أدق ، تستخدم الطريقة نماذج توزيع شفافة لاستخراج السياقات البارزة للكلمات التي تم تحديدها على أنها سمات تمييزية. يصل أداء النظام إلى دقة تصل إلى 70٪ عند تطبيقه على مجموعة بيانات التطوير ، ولكن تنخفض دقته (63٪) في مجموعة بيانات الاختبار الرسمية.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe la estrategia no supervisada presentada por el equipo de CitiusNLP a la Tarea 10 de SemEval 2018, una tarea que consiste en predecir si una palabra es un atributo discriminatorio entre otras dos palabras. Nuestra estrategia se basa en la correspondencia entre los atributos discriminativos y los contextos relevantes de una palabra. Más precisamente, el método utiliza modelos de distribución transparentes para extraer contextos destacados de palabras que se identifican como atributos discriminativos. El rendimiento del sistema alcanza una precisión de alrededor del 70% cuando se aplica al conjunto de datos de desarrollo, pero su precisión disminuye (63%) en el conjunto de datos de prueba oficial.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a estratégia não supervisionada submetida pela equipe do CitiusNLP à Tarefa 10 do SemEval 2018, uma tarefa que consiste em prever se uma palavra é um atributo discriminativo entre duas outras palavras. Nossa estratégia se baseia na correspondência entre atributos discriminativos e contextos relevantes de uma palavra. Mais precisamente, o método usa modelos distribucionais transparentes para extrair contextos salientes de palavras que são identificadas como atributos discriminativos. O desempenho do sistema atinge cerca de 70% de precisão quando aplicado no conjunto de dados de desenvolvimento, mas sua precisão cai (63%) no conjunto de dados de teste oficial.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la stratégie non supervisée soumise par l'équipe CitiusNLP à la tâche 10 de SemEval 2018, une tâche qui consiste à prédire si un mot est un attribut discriminant entre deux autres mots. Notre stratégie repose sur la correspondance entre les attributs discriminants et les contextes pertinents d'un mot. Plus précisément, le procédé utilise des modèles de distribution transparents pour extraire des contextes saillants de mots identifiés comme des attributs discriminants. Les performances du système atteignent une précision d'environ 70\xa0% lorsqu'elles sont appliquées au jeu de données de développement, mais leur précision diminue (63\xa0%) sur le jeu de données de test officiel.", 'ja': 'この記事では、CitiusNLPチームがSemEval 2018タスク10に提出した監督されていない戦略について説明します。このタスクは、単語が他の2つの単語間の識別属性であるかどうかを予測することで構成されています。私たちの戦略は、差別的属性と単語の関連する文脈との間の対応に依存しています。より正確には、この方法は、識別的属性として識別される単語の顕著な文脈を抽出するために透明な分布モデルを使用する。システムのパフォーマンスは、開発データセットに適用すると約70 ％の精度に達しますが、公式のテストデータセットではその精度は63 ％に低下します。', 'zh': '本文引CitiusNLP团队交SemEval 2018 Task 10无监策,该占一单词是非两单词之间判别属性。 吾策赖于判单词上下文之应也。 更准说,该法用透明的分布模形来提取被标识为判别属性的单词显着上下文。 当用于开发数据集时,统性之准确率至于约70%,而于官方测试数据集上其准确率降(63%)。', 'hi': 'यह आलेख वर्णन करता है कि CitiusNLP टीम द्वारा SemEval 2018 कार्य 10 के लिए सबमिट की गई असुरक्षित रणनीति, एक कार्य जिसमें भविष्यवाणी की जाती है कि क्या कोई शब्द दो अन्य शब्दों के बीच भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषता है। हमारी रणनीति भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं और एक शब्द के प्रासंगिक संदर्भों के बीच पत्राचार पर निर्भर करती है। अधिक सटीक रूप से, विधि शब्दों के मुख्य संदर्भों को निकालने के लिए पारदर्शी वितरण मॉडल का उपयोग करती है जिन्हें भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं के रूप में पहचाना जाता है। विकास डेटासेट पर लागू होने पर सिस्टम प्रदर्शन लगभग 70% सटीकता तक पहुंच जाता है, लेकिन आधिकारिक परीक्षण डेटासेट पर इसकी सटीकता (63%) नीचे चली जाती है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается неконтролируемая стратегия, представленная командой CiterrNLP для задачи 10 SemEval 2018, задача, которая состоит в том, чтобы предсказать, является ли слово дискриминирующим атрибутом между двумя другими словами. Наша стратегия опирается на соответствие между дискриминационными атрибутами и соответствующими контекстами слова. Точнее, метод использует прозрачные распределительные модели для извлечения выраженных контекстов слов, которые идентифицируются как дискриминационные атрибуты. Производительность системы достигает примерно 70% точности при ее применении в наборе данных разработки, но ее точность снижается (63%) в официальном тестовом наборе данных.', 'ga': 'Déanann an t-alt seo cur síos ar an straitéis gan mhaoirseacht a chuir foireann CitiusNLP isteach chuig Tasc 10 SemEval 2018, tasc a chuimsíonn a thuar cé acu an tréith idirdhealaitheach idir dhá fhocal eile é focal. Braitheann ár straitéis ar an gcomhfhreagras idir tréithe idirdhealaitheacha agus comhthéacsanna ábhartha focal. Níos cruinne, úsáideann an modh samhlacha dáileacháin trédhearcacha chun comhthéacsanna suntasacha focal a shainaithnítear mar tréithe idirdhealaitheacha a bhaint as. Sroicheann feidhmíocht an chórais thart ar 70% cruinneas nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm é ar an tacar sonraí forbartha, ach téann a chruinneas síos (63%) ar an tacar sonraí tástála oifigiúil.', 'ka': 'ამ პექტიკის აღწერა სტრატიგია, რომელიც სტრატისNLP ჯგუფის გადატანა სტრატიკური 2018 დავალებისთვის, რომელიც შეიძლება წარმოიდგინოთ ესტრატიკური ატრიბუტია ორი სიტყვის შორის. ჩვენი სტრატიგია დაახლოდება დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების და შესაბამისი სიტყვების კონტექსტზე. მეტი უფრო უფრო დარწმუნელად გამოყენებს გარემობილობული მოდელები სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების შექმნა, რომელიც დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტებით იგივერდებ სისტემის წარმოდგენება 70% წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენება, როდესაც განვითარება მონაცემების საზოგადოებაში გამოყენება, მაგრამ მისი წარმოდგენება (63%) უფრო აღმოდგ', 'el': 'Αυτό το άρθρο περιγράφει τη στρατηγική χωρίς επίβλεψη που υποβλήθηκε από την ομάδα στο έργο 10, μια εργασία που συνίσταται στην πρόβλεψη κατά πόσον μια λέξη αποτελεί διακριτικό χαρακτηριστικό μεταξύ δύο άλλων λέξεων. Η στρατηγική μας βασίζεται στην αντιστοιχία μεταξύ διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών και συναφών πλαισίων μιας λέξης. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, η μέθοδος χρησιμοποιεί διαφανή μοντέλα κατανομής για να εξάγει σημαντικά πλαίσια λέξεων που αναγνωρίζονται ως διακριτικά χαρακτηριστικά. Η απόδοση του συστήματος φτάνει περίπου 70% ακρίβεια όταν εφαρμόζεται στο σύνολο δεδομένων ανάπτυξης, αλλά η ακρίβειά του μειώνεται (63%) στο επίσημο σύνολο δεδομένων δοκιμής.', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje aprašoma neobservuota strategija, kurią CitiusNLP grupė pateikė 2010 m. SemEval 10 uždaviniui – užduotis, kurią sudaro nuspėti, ar žodis yra diskriminacinis požymis tarp kitų dviejų žodžių. Mūsų strategija grindžiama diskriminacinių požymių ir atitinkamų žodžio kontekstų korespondencija. Tiksliau, taikant šį metodą naudojami skaidrūs paskirstymo modeliai, kad būtų galima ištraukti svarbius žodžių kontekstus, kurie laikomi diskriminaciniais požymiais. Sistemos veiksmingumas pasiekia maždaug 70 % tikslumą, kai jis taikomas rengimo duomenų rinkiniui, tačiau jo tikslumas mažėja (63 %) oficialių bandymų duomenų rinkiniui.', 'hu': 'Ez a cikk bemutatja a CitiusNLP csapat által a SemEval 2018 Task 10-hez benyújtott felügyelet nélküli stratégiát, amely azt jelenti, hogy egy szó két másik szó között diszkriminatív attribútumot jelent-e. Stratégiánk a diszkriminatív tulajdonságok és a szó releváns kontextusai közötti megfelelésen alapul. Pontosabban, a módszer átlátható eloszlási modelleket használ a diszkriminatív attribútumokként azonosított szavak kiemelkedő kontextusainak kivonására. A rendszer teljesítménye körülbelül 70%-os pontosságot ér el a fejlesztési adatkészleten történő alkalmazásakor, de pontossága (63%) csökken a hivatalos tesztadatkészleten.', 'kk': 'Бұл мақала CitiusNLP командасы 2018 жылдың 10- тапсырмасына жіберілмеген стратегияны таңдайды. Бұл сөз басқа екі сөздің арасындағы дискриминациялық атрибуттық емес деген тапсырманы таңдайды. Біздің стратегиямыз дискриминациялық атрибуттардың және сөздің маңызды контексттерінің сәйкестігіне тәуелді. Ең дұрыс, әдісі дискриминациялық атрибуттар ретінде белгіленген сөздердің тұмандық үлгілерін тарқату үшін мөлдірлі үлгілерді қолданады. Жүйелік жасау деректер жиынында қолданғанда 70% деген дұрыстығын жеткізеді, бірақ оның дұрыстығы официальны сынақтар жиынында (63%) төмендетді.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive la strategia non supervisionata presentata dal team CitiusNLP al SemEval 2018 Task 10, un compito che consiste nel prevedere se una parola è un attributo discriminatorio tra altre due parole. La nostra strategia si basa sulla corrispondenza tra attributi discriminatori e contesti rilevanti di una parola. Più precisamente, il metodo utilizza modelli distributivi trasparenti per estrarre contesti salienti di parole identificati come attributi discriminatori. Le prestazioni del sistema raggiungono circa il 70% di precisione quando viene applicato sul set di dati di sviluppo, ma la sua accuratezza diminuisce (63%) sul set di dati ufficiali di test.', 'ms': 'Artikel ini menggambarkan strategi tidak diawasi dihantar oleh pasukan CitiusNLP ke SemEval 2018 Task 10, tugas yang terdiri daripada meramalkan sama ada perkataan adalah atribut diskriminatif diantara dua perkataan lain. Strategi kita bergantung pada persamaan antara atribut diskriminatif dan konteks relevan satu perkataan. Lebih tepatnya, kaedah menggunakan model distribusi transparen untuk mengekstrak konteks salient perkataan yang dikenali sebagai atribut diskriminatif. The system performance reaches about 70% accuracy when it is applied on the development dataset, but its accuracy goes down (63%) on the official test dataset.', 'mk': 'Оваа статија ја опишува ненадгледуваната стратегија поднесена од тимот CitiusNLP на SemEval 2018 задачата 10, задача која се состои од предвидување дали зборот е дискриминативен атрибут помеѓу два други збора. Нашата стратегија зависи од кореспонденцијата помеѓу дискриминативните атрибути и релевантните контексти на зборот. Попрецизно, методот користи транспарентни дистрибуционални модели за извлекување на славни контексти на зборови кои се идентификуваат како дискриминативни атрибути. Системската перформанса достигнува прецизност од околу 70 отсто кога се применува на податоците за развој, но неговата прецизност се намалува (63 отсто) на официјалниот тестовен податок.', 'ml': 'ഈ രേഖയില്\u200d സിറ്റിയുസ് NLP ടീം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10 ക്ക് നല്\u200dകിയ സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഒരു കാര്യം വിവരിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ഒരു വ നമ്മുടെ സ്ട്രായേജ്യം വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വാക്കുകളുടെ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ഉത്തരവാദിത് കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി വിതരണ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യവസ്ഥകളായി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ സ The system performance reaches about 70% accuracy when it is applied on the development dataset, but its accuracy goes down (63%) on the official test dataset.', 'no': 'Denne artikkelen beskriver den ulike strategien som CitiusNLP-gruppa sender til den semiEval 2018 oppgåva 10, eit oppgåve som inneheld av å foregå om eit ord er ein diskriminativ attributt mellom to andre ord. Strategien vårt er avhengig av korrespondensen mellom diskriminasjonale attributt og relevante kontekstar av eit ord. Meir nøyaktig brukar metoden gjennomsiktige distribusjonsmodeller for å pakka ut salient kontekstar av ord som er identifisert som diskriminasjonale attributt. Systemutviklinga når det vert brukt på utviklingsdatabaken, men nøyaktigheten går ned (63%) på den offisielle test dataset.', 'mt': 'Dan l-artikolu jiddeskrivi l-istrateġija mhux sorveljata ppreżentata mit-tim CitiusNLP lis-SemEval 2018 Task 10, kompitu li jikkonsisti fit-tbassir jekk kelma hijiex attribut diskriminatorju bejn żewġ kliem ieħor. L-istrateġija tagħna tiddependi fuq il-korrispondenza bejn l-attributi diskriminatorji u l-kuntesti rilevanti ta’ kelma. B’mod aktar preċiż, il-metodu juża mudelli ta’ distribuzzjoni trasparenti biex jestrakta kuntesti salienti ta’ kliem li huma identifikati bħala attributi diskriminatorji. Il-prestazzjoni tas-sistema tilħaq il-preċiżjoni ta’ madwar 70% meta tiġi applikata fuq is-sett tad-dejta tal-iżvilupp, iżda l-preċiżjoni tagħha tonqos (63%) fuq is-sett tad-dejta uffiċjali tat-testijiet.', 'mn': 'Энэ баримт CitiusNLP багийн SemEval 2018 Task 10-д зохион байгуулагддаггүй стратегийг тайлбарлаж байна. Үүнийг өөр хоёр үгийн хоорондын ялгаатай харьцуулах эсэхийг тодорхойлж байдаг. Бидний стратеги нь нэг үгийн ялгаагүй харилцааны харилцааны харилцааныг хамаарна. Илүү тодорхой, арга нь хуваарилцааны загварыг ашиглаж, ялгаатай харилцаа гэж тодорхойлж буй үгнүүдийн шалтгаан нөхцөл байдлыг гаргахад илүү тодорхой хуваарилцааны загварыг ашигладаг. Бүтээлтийн үйл ажиллагаа хөгжлийн өгөгдлийн санд хэрэглэгддэг үед 70% зөв байдаг. Гэхдээ түүний зөв байдал нь ерөнхийлөгчийн тест өгөгдлийн санд (63%) буурна.', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා නගරයෙන් සිටියුස්NLP කණ්ඩායමයෙන් සිම්වේල් 2018 කාර්ය 10 කිරීමට පිළිගත්ත නැති ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය, වචනය අනිත් වචනය අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් සහ වචනයක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් අතර සම්බන්ධතාවක් විශේෂ කරනවා. විශේෂයෙන්, විධානය පාරදේශ විතරක් මොඩේල් භාවිත කරනවා වචන සුලින් සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ඒ වචනය විශ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය 70% විශේෂ දත්ත සූද්ධතාවට ඇතුලත් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ඒත් එයාගේ හරියට (63%) පරීක්ෂා දත්ත ස', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano strategię bez nadzoru przedstawioną przez zespół CitiusNLP do SemEval 2018 Task 10, która polega na przewidywaniu, czy słowo jest atrybutem dyskryminacyjnym pomiędzy dwoma innymi słowami. Nasza strategia opiera się na korespondencji między cechami dyskryminacyjnymi a odpowiednimi kontekstami słowa. Mówiąc dokładniej, metoda wykorzystuje przejrzyste modele dystrybucji do wyodrębnienia istotnych kontekstów słów, które są zidentyfikowane jako atrybuty dyskryminacyjne. Wydajność systemu osiąga około 70% dokładności, gdy jest stosowana na zbiorze danych deweloperskich, ale jego dokładność spada (63%) w oficjalnym zbiorze danych testowych.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan wuxuu ku qoran qoraalkii aan la ilaalinayn ee kooxda CitiusNLP u soo dhiibay shaqo 10 ee SemEval 2018, taas oo ka mid ah shaqo ku qoran ka sii sheegta in ereygu uu yahay takoorid labada hadal oo kale. Qatarkayagu wuxuu ku xiran yahay habka takoorista iyo qaababka ku saabsan hadalka. Si saxda ah, qaababka waxaa lagu isticmaalaa tusaale ahaan kala qaybsan oo cad si uu uga soo bixiyo qoraal-hoos ah oo loo yaqaan sida takoorid. Sameynta nidaamka waxay gaadhaa qiyaastii 70% oo saxda ah marka lagu codsado kooxda danbiyada horumarinta, laakiin saxda waxaa ku dhaca (63%) bogga shahaadada rasmiga ah.', 'sr': 'Ovaj članak opisuje nepotrebnu strategiju koju je tim CitiusNLP predao zadatku 10 iz polovice 2018. godine, zadatak koji sastoji od predviđanja da li je reč diskriminacijski atribut između dve druge reči. Naša strategija se oslanja na dopisnost između diskriminacijskih atributa i relevantnih konteksta riječi. Taènije, metod koristi transparentne distribucijske modele kako bi izvukao saliène kontekste reèi koje su identifikovane kao diskriminacijske atribute. Izvrsnost sistema postiže točnost oko 70% kada se primjenjuje na setu podataka za razvoj, ali preciznost se smanjuje (63%) na službenom setu podataka za testove.', 'ro': 'Acest articol descrie strategia nesupravegheată prezentată de echipa CitiusNLP Task 10 SemEval 2018, o sarcină care constă în a prezice dacă un cuvânt este un atribut discriminatoriu între alte două cuvinte. Strategia noastră se bazează pe corespondența dintre atributele discriminatorii și contextele relevante ale unui cuvânt. Mai precis, metoda utilizează modele distribuționale transparente pentru a extrage contexte importante de cuvinte identificate ca atribute discriminatorii. Performanța sistemului atinge o precizie de aproximativ 70% atunci când este aplicată pe setul de date de dezvoltare, dar acuratețea sa scade (63%) pe setul de date oficial de testare.', 'ur': 'This article describes the unsupervised strategy submitted by the CitiusNLP team to the SemEval 2018 Task 10, a task which consists of predicting whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two other words. ہماری استراتژی ایک کلمہ کے متعلق تفریق کے متعلق اور متعلق تفریق کے درمیان تعلق پر ہے. اور زیادہ دقیق، یہ طریقہ استعمال کرتا ہے کہ کلمات کے سائل کنٹکسٹس کو اٹھانے کے لئے پارشیدہ تقسیم کی موڈل استعمال کرتا ہے جن کو تقسیم کرنے والی اثرات کے طور پر پہچان دیا جاتا ہے. سیسٹم کی فعالیت 70% دقیق پہنچتی ہے جبکہ اس کو توسعہ ڈیٹ سٹ پر لازم کیا جاتا ہے، لیکن اس کی دقیق (63%) رسمی تست ڈیٹ سٹ پر اتر جاتی ہے.', 'sv': 'Den här artikeln beskriver den oövervakade strategi som CitiusNLP-teamet lämnat in till SemEval 2018 Task 10, en uppgift som består i att förutsäga om ett ord är ett diskriminerande attribut mellan två andra ord. Vår strategi bygger på korrespondansen mellan diskriminerande attribut och relevanta sammanhang i ett ord. Mer exakt använder metoden transparenta fördelningsmodeller för att extrahera framträdande kontexter av ord som identifieras som diskriminerande attribut. Systemets prestanda når cirka 70% noggrannhet när den används på utvecklingsdatauppsättningen, men dess noggrannhet sjunker (63%) på den officiella testdatauppsättningen.', 'ta': 'இந்த கட்டுரை செம்Eval 2018 பணிக்கு வழங்கப்பட்ட CitiusNLP குழுவில் காப்பாற்றப்படாத த திட்டத்தை விவரிக்கிறது, ஒரு செயல், இரண்டு வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இடையே ஒரு வார நம்முடைய திட்டம் வேறு வித்தியாசமான குணங்கள் மற்றும் ஒரு வார்த்தையின் தொடர்புடைய முறைகளுக்கிடையே சார More precisely, the method uses transparent distributional models to extract salient contexts of words which are identified as discriminative attributes.  முன்னேற்ற தகவல் அமைப்பு செயல்பாட்டில் அது பயன்படுத்தப்படும்போது 70% சரியான திட்டம் அடைகிறது, ஆனால் அதில் சரியான திட்டத்தின் தரவ', 'uz': "Bu maqola SemEval 2018 Vazifalar 10 ga joʻnatilgan CitiusNLP guruhiga joʻnatilmagan strategini anglatadi. Bu bir so'z ikki so'zlar orasidagi ajratiqlik holatda deb hisoblash mumkin. Bizning strategimiz taqdim holatga va muhim soʻzning murakkablik holatlariga ishonadi. Koʻproq darajada, shaxsiy tarqatish modellarini ishlatish mumkin, bu soʻzlarni ajratish imkoniyatlari deb belgilangan soʻzlarni ajratish uchun. Maʼlumotlar bazasidan foydalanilganda tizimning bajarishi 70% taqdimlikga ega bo'ladi, ammo uning tasdiqligi rasm maʼlumot bazasidan foydalanadi (63%).", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả chiến lược không giám sát được gửi bởi đội Citiuba Nchọc (Cố vấn) cho SemEvl bây giờ là nhiệm vụ 10, một nhiệm vụ gồm việc dự đoán rằng một từ là một dấu hiệu phân biệt giữa hai từ khác. Chiến lược của chúng ta dựa trên sự tương ứng giữa các yếu tố phân biệt và ngữ cảnh liên quan của một từ. Cách này dùng các mô hình phân phối trong suốt để trích dẫn các mặt chữ được xác định là thuộc tính phân biệt. Hệ thống có độ chính xác cao khoảng 171 khi nó được áp dụng trên bộ dữ liệu phát triển, nhưng độ chính xác của nó giảm (63=) trên bộ dữ liệu thử chính thức.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва стратегията без надзор, представена от екипа на задача 10, която се състои в предсказване дали дадена дума е дискриминационен атрибут между две други думи. Нашата стратегия разчита на кореспонденцията между дискриминационните атрибути и релевантните контексти на дадена дума. По-точно методът използва прозрачни разпределителни модели за извличане на очевидни контексти на думи, които са идентифицирани като дискриминационни атрибути. Ефективността на системата достига около 70% точност, когато се прилага върху набора от данни за разработката, но точността й намалява (63%) при официалния набор от данни за теста.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver den uautoriserede strategi, som CitiusNLP-teamet har sendt til SemEval 2018 Task 10, en opgave, der består i at forudsige, om et ord er en diskriminerende attribut mellem to andre ord. Vores strategi bygger på korrespondancen mellem diskriminerende egenskaber og relevante sammenhænge i et ord. Mere præcist anvender metoden gennemsigtige fordelingsmodeller til at udtrække vigtige sammenhænge af ord, der identificeres som diskriminerende egenskaber. Systemets ydeevne når omkring 70% nøjagtighed, når den anvendes på udviklingsdatasættet, men dens nøjagtighed falder (63%) på det officielle testdatasæt.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de strategie zonder toezicht die door het CitiusNLP-team is ingediend bij de SemEval 2018 Task 10, een taak die bestaat uit voorspellen of een woord een onderscheidend kenmerk is tussen twee andere woorden. Onze strategie is gebaseerd op de correspondentie tussen discriminerende kenmerken en relevante contexten van een woord. Meer precies maakt de methode gebruik van transparante distributiemodellen om opvallende contexten van woorden te extraheren die worden geïdentificeerd als discriminerende attributen. De systeemprestaties bereiken ongeveer 70% nauwkeurigheid wanneer het wordt toegepast op de ontwikkelingsdataset, maar de nauwkeurigheid daalt (63%) op de officiële testdataset.', 'hr': 'Ovaj članak opisuje nepotrebnu strategiju koju je tim CitiusNLP predao zadatku 10 iz poluvremenog razdoblja 2018. godine, zadatak koji sastoji od predviđanja da li je riječ diskriminacijski atribut između dvije druge riječi. Naša strategija se oslanja na dopisnost između diskriminacijskih atributa i relevantnih konteksta riječi. Tačnije, metod koristi transparentne distribucijske modele za izvlačenje saličnih konteksta riječi koje su identificirane kao diskriminacijske atribute. Proizvodnja sustava postiže točnost oko 70% kada se primjenjuje na sastavu podataka za razvoj, ali preciznost se smanjuje (63%) na službenom sastavu podataka za ispitivanje.', 'de': 'Dieser Artikel beschreibt die unbeaufsichtigte Strategie, die das CitiusNLP-Team bei der SemEval 2018 Task 10 eingereicht hat. Diese Aufgabe besteht darin, vorherzusagen, ob ein Wort ein diskriminierendes Attribut zwischen zwei anderen Wörtern ist. Unsere Strategie basiert auf der Korrespondenz zwischen diskriminierenden Attributen und relevanten Kontexten eines Wortes. Genauer gesagt nutzt die Methode transparente Verteilungsmodelle, um markante Kontexte von Wörtern zu extrahieren, die als diskriminierende Attribute identifiziert werden. Die Systemleistung erreicht etwa 70% Genauigkeit, wenn sie auf den Entwicklungsdatensatz angewendet wird, aber ihre Genauigkeit sinkt (63%) im offiziellen Testdatensatz.', 'id': 'This article describes the unsupervised strategy submitted by the CitiusNLP team to the SemEval 2018 Task 10, a task which consists of predict whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two other words.  Strategi kita bergantung pada korespondensi antara atribut diskriminatif dan konteks relevan dari satu kata. Lebih tepatnya, metode menggunakan model distribusi transparen untuk mengekstrak konteks salin kata yang dikenal sebagai atribut diskriminatif. Performasi sistem mencapai sekitar 70% akurasi ketika diterapkan pada set data perkembangan, tetapi akurasinya turun (63%) pada set data tes resmi.', 'ko': '본고는CitiunsLP팀이SemEval 2018 퀘스트 10에 제출한 무감독 전략을 묘사하는데 이 퀘스트는 한 단어가 다른 두 단어 간의 차이 속성을 예측하는 것을 포함한다.우리의 전략은 구별적 속성과 단어 관련 상하문 간의 대응 관계에 의존한다.더욱 정확히 말하면 이 방법은 투명 분포 모델을 이용하여 속성을 구분하는 단어로 식별되는 현저한 상하문을 추출한다.데이터 집합을 개발할 때 시스템 성능은 70% 정도의 정밀도에 달하지만 정부 테스트 데이터 집합에서 정밀도(63%)가 떨어진다.', 'fa': 'این مقاله استراتژی غیرقابل تحویل توسط تیم CitiusNLP به کار ۱۰ سال ۲۰۱۸ توصیف می\u200cکند، که از پیش بینی می\u200cکند که آیا یک کلمه یک ویژه جدایی بین دو کلمه دیگر است. استراتژی ما بر ارتباط بین ویژه های جدایی و موضوع مربوط به یک کلمه بستگی دارد. دقیقاً این روش از مدل های تقسیم شفافیق استفاده می\u200cکند تا موضوعات استفاده کند که به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای تقسیم شناسایی می\u200cشوند. عملکرد سیستم به حدود ۷۰ درصد دقیق رسیده وقتی بر مجموعه داده\u200cهای توسعه کاربرد می\u200cشود، ولی دقیق آن در مجموعه داده\u200cهای رسمی (۶۳ درصد) پایین می\u200cشود.', 'tr': 'Bu makala CitiusNLP toparynyň SemEval 2018 Görevi 10-ine gönderilýän zadyny tassyýar edýär. Bu söz başga iki söz aralygynda diskriminýa hasaplanyp däldigini tassyýar. Biziň stratejimiz diskriminçylyk hasaplaryň we möhüm sözleriniň meseleleriniň arasynda täsirlenişigine ynanýar. Dyggat şekilde, metin döwürekli sözlerin çykyş hasaplamak üçin transparent daýlamak nusgalaryny ulanýar. Sistem netijesi gelişirmek datasynda tapawutlandygynda 70% dogry ýagdaýynda ýetişir, ýöne resmi testiň düzeninde dogry azalýar (63%).', 'sq': 'Ky artikull përshkruan strategjinë e pazgjidhur të paraqitur nga ekipi i CitiusNLP në SemEval 2018 Task 10, një detyrë që përbëhet nga parashikimi nëse një fjalë është një atributë diskriminuese midis dy fjalëve të tjera. Strategjia jonë mbështetet në korrespondencën midis atributeve diskriminuese dhe konteksteve të rëndësishme të një fjale. Më saktësisht, metoda përdor modele shpërndarëse transparente për të nxjerrë kontekste të rëndësishme fjalësh që janë identifikuar si atribute diskriminuese. Performanca e sistemit arrin rreth 70% saktësi kur zbatohet në grupin e të dhënave të zhvillimit, por saktësia e tij bie në fund (63%) në grupin zyrtar të të dhënave të test it.', 'sw': 'This article describes the unsupervised strategy submitted by the CitiusNLP team to the SemEval 2018 Task 10, a task which consists of predict whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two other words.  Mpango wetu unategemea mawasiliano kati ya mifano ya ubaguzi na mikakati inayohusiana na neno. Zaidi ya sahihi, mbinu hiyo inatumia mifano ya usambazaji wa uwazi ili kutengeneza mazingira ya maneno yanayotambuliwa kama sifa za ubaguzi. Uwezeshaji wa mfumo unafikia takribani asilimia 70 pale unavyotumiwa kwenye seti ya taarifa za maendeleo, lakini uhakika wake unapungua (asilimia 63) kwenye seti ya taarifa rasmi za jaribio.', 'af': "Hierdie artikel beskrywe die onverondersteunde strategie wat deur die CitiusNLP-span aan die SemEval 2018-taak 10 ondersteun is, 'n taak wat bestaan van voorskou of 'n woord 'n diskriminasiewe eienskap tussen twee ander woorde is. Ons strategie verlig op die ooreenstemming tussen diskriminasiewe eienskappe en relevante kontekste van 'n woord. Meir presies, gebruik die metode deursigtig verspreidingsmodele om salient konteks van woorde uit te pak wat as diskriminasiewe eienskappe geïdentifiseer word. Die stelsel presisie bereik omtrent 70% presisie wanneer dit op die ontwikkelingsdatastel aangepas word, maar sy presisie gaan af (63%) op die offisiele toets datastel.", 'am': 'ይህ ጽሑፍ የCitiusNLP ቡድን ለስራ 10 ሰብዓት የተደረገውን ያልጠበቀው strategy ይናገራል፡፡ strategieችን በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች እና የንግግር ግንኙነት እና በተለየ ቃላት ግንኙነት ላይ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የሥርዓት አካባቢ አካባቢ የቃላትን ምሳሌ ለመውጣት የሚጠቅምበት ማህበረሰብ ነው፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤት በማድረግ ዳታዎችን በተጠቀም ጊዜ 70 በመቶ ያህል እርግጠኛ ይደርሳል፤ ነገር ግን ቁጥረቱ (63 በመቶ) በሥልጣን ፈተና ዳታዎች ላይ ይጎድላል።', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধের বর্ণনা করছে সিটিউএনএলপি টিম সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজের কাছে প্রদান করা অরক্ষিত কৌশল, যা ১০ জনের কাজ, যা ভবিষ্যৎ করা হচ্ছে দুই শব্দের মধ্যে একটি বৈ আমাদের কৌশল বৈষম্যের বৈষম্য এবং একটি শব্দের প্রতিযোগিতার উপর নির্ভর করে। আরো পরিস্কার, এই পদ্ধতি স্বচ্ছতা বিতরণ মডেল ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন শব্দের বিভিন্ন বৈষম্য হিসেবে চিহ্নিত করা হয়। ডেভেলপমেন্ট ডাটাসেটে এটি প্রয়োগ করা হলে সিস্টেমের প্রায় ৭০% সঠিকভাবে পৌঁছে যায়, কিন্তু এটি সরকারি পরীক্ষা ডাটাসেটে পর', 'az': 'Bu məktub CitiusNLP takımının 2018 Görevi 10-si SemEval tərəfindən təyin edilməmiş stratejiyi təsdiqləyir. Bu məktub, bir söz başqa iki söz arasında ayrı-ayrı təhsil olub olmadığını təmin edir. Bizim stratejimiz sözlərin müxtəlif təsirlərin və əlaqəsiz təsirlərin arasındakı müxtəlifliyə təvəkkül edir. Daha doğrudan, metod müxtəlif əlaqələr kimi tanındıqları sözlərin çəkilmək üçün açıq dağıtım modellərini istifadə edir. Sistem performansı təmizləmə veri qutusunda istifadə edildiyi zaman 70%-in doğruluğuna yetişir, amma onun doğruluğu resmi sınama veri qutusunda (63%) düşər.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է CitiosNSP թիմի կողմից ներկայացված անվերահսկված ռազմավարությունը, որը ներկայացված է 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" 10-ի հանձնարարությանը, հանձնարարությունը, որը կազմում է կանխատեսելով, թե բառը այլ երկու բառերի միջև տարբեր Մեր ռազմավարությունը հիմնված է բառի խտրականության առանձնահատկությունների և կարևոր կոնտեքստների համապատասխանության վրա: Ավելի ճշգրիտ, մեթոդը օգտագործում է թափանցիկ տարածման մոդելներ բառերի կարևոր կոնտեքստների դուրս բերելու համար, որոնք հայտնաբերվում են որպես խտրականության առանձնահատկություններ: Համակարգը հասնում է 70 տոկոսի ճշգրտության, երբ այն կիրառվում է զարգացման տվյալների համակարգի վրա, բայց դրա ճշգրտությունը նվազում է (63 տոկոս) պաշտոնական փորձարկման տվյալների համակարգի վրա:', 'bs': 'Ovaj članak opisuje neodređenu strategiju koju je tim CitiusNLP predao zadatku 10 iz polovice 2018. godine, zadatak koji sastoji od predviđanja da li je riječ diskriminacijski atribut između dva druga riječi. Naša strategija se oslanja na dopisnost između diskriminacijskih atributa i relevantnih konteksta riječi. Tačnije, metod koristi transparentne distribucijske modele za izvlačenje saličnih konteksta riječi koje su identificirane kao diskriminacijske atribute. Proizvodnja sustava postiže točnost oko 70% kada se primjenjuje na setu podataka za razvoj, ali preciznost se smanjuje (63%) na službenom setu podataka za testove.', 'ca': "This article describes the unsupervised strategy submitted by the CitiusNLP team to the SemEval 2018 Task 10, a task which consists of predict whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two other words.  La nostra estratègia es basa en la correspondència entre atributs discriminatius i contextes pertinents d'una paraula. Més precisament, el mètode utilitza models de distribució transparents per extrair contextes salients de paraules identificats com atributs discriminatius. El rendiment del sistema arriba a una precisió del 70% quan s'aplica al conjunt de dades de desenvolupament, però la seva precisió disminueix (63%) en el conjunt oficial de dades de prova.", 'et': 'Artiklis kirjeldatakse CitiusNLP meeskonna poolt SemEval 2018 ülesandele 10 esitatud järelevalveta strateegiat, mis koosneb sellest, kas sõna on kahe teise sõna diskrimineeriv atribuut. Meie strateegia tugineb diskrimineerivate atribuutide ja sõna asjakohaste kontekstide vastavusele. Täpsemalt, meetod kasutab läbipaistvaid jaotusmudeleid, et eraldada silmapaistvaid kontekste sõnadest, mis on tuvastatud diskrimineerivate atribuutidena. Süsteemi jõudlus jõuab arendusandmetele rakendamisel umbes 70% täpsuseni, kuid selle täpsus langeb ametlikel testiandmetel (63%).', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje strategii bez dohledu, kterou tým CitiusNLP předložil úkolu SemEval 2018 Task 10, který spočívá v předpovědi, zda je slovo diskriminačním atributem mezi dvěma dalšími slovy. Naše strategie se opírá o korespondenci mezi diskriminačními atributy a relevantními kontextemi slova. Přesněji řečeno, metoda využívá transparentní distribuční modely k extrakci významných kontextů slov, které jsou identifikovány jako diskriminační atributy. Výkon systému dosahuje asi 70% přesnosti, když je aplikován na vývojovou sadu dat, ale jeho přesnost klesá (63%) u oficiálních testovacích dat.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan CitiusNLP-tiimin SemEval 2018 Task 10 -tehtävään esittämä valvomaton strategia, joka koostuu siitä, onko sana kahden muun sanan erotteleva attribuutti. Strategiamme perustuu syrjivien attribuuttien ja sanan merkityksellisten kontekstien vastaavuuteen. Tarkemmin sanottuna menetelmässä käytetään läpinäkyviä jakelumalleja erottamaan erottuviksi attribuuteiksi tunnistetuista sanoista näkyviä konteksteja. Järjestelmän suorituskyky saavuttaa noin 70% tarkkuuden, kun sitä käytetään kehitysaineistoon, mutta sen tarkkuus laskee (63%) viralliseen testiaineistoon verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Artiklo iki dadi akeh nesaturan tasari nggawe barang nggawe barang gambar durung durung durung cara sing dumadhakan durung, durung mengko perbudhakan bakal kelas sing apik dhéwé durung kelas. Tulung Laptop" and "Desktop Sistem kang wektu nggawe barang langgar sampeyan 75% sing teka nang ingkang dadi sing nggunakake dadi nggunakake, kepengin dadi kapan-kapan kanggo sabên (64 %) kanggo teka opera dadi sing ujian.', 'ha': "Wannan makala na bayyana the unsupretad tactiyar wanda the CitiusNLP team ya bãyar da zuwa the Semeval 2018 Taimar 10, wani aikin wanda ke ƙunsa da shi na gabatar da wani magana a tsakanin sauran biyu. YakinMu yana dõgara ga mataimaki a tsakanin misalin da masu da muhimmi na maganar. Yana da ƙayyade, metoden yana amfani da misãlai masu yin diffdi da bayyani dõmin ya fita matsayin salitacce wanda za'a gane su kamar sifatin yin ɓarna. Tafiyar da na'urar na'ura ya kai daidai asilimita 70 a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi a kan daidaita danne na developer, kuma amma taƙaitarsa ta sauka (63%) a kan tsarin jarraba rasmi.", 'sk': 'V tem članku je opisana strategija, ki jo ekipa CitiusNLP predloži nalogi 10 SemEval 2018, ki je sestavljena iz napovedi, ali je beseda diskriminativni atribut med dvema drugima besedama. Naša strategija temelji na korespondenci med diskriminativnimi atributi in relevantnimi konteksti besede. Natančneje, metoda uporablja pregledne distribucijske modele za izvlečevanje pomembnih kontekstov besed, ki so identificirane kot diskriminativne atribute. Učinkovitost sistema doseže približno 70% natančnost pri uporabi na razvojnem naboru podatkov, njegova natančnost pa se zmanjša (63%) pri uradnem testnem naboru podatkov.', 'he': 'המאמר הזה מתאר את האסטרטגיה ללא השגחה שנשלחה על ידי צוות CitiusNLP למשימה 10 של SemEval 2018, משימה שמתכוונת לחזות אם מילה היא תכונה דיסקרטיבית בין שתי מילים אחרות. האסטרטגיה שלנו מסמכת על התכתבות בין תכונות דיסקרטיביים ולקשרים רלוונטיים של מילה. יותר מדויק, השיטה משתמשת בדוגמנים פיצוצים שקופים כדי לחלץ קשרים מפורסמים של מילים שזוהות כתכונות דיסקרטיביים. ביצועי המערכת מגיעים לדיוקת בערך 70% כאשר היא מופעלת על קבוצת נתוני הפיתוח, אך הדיוקת שלה נופלת (63%) על קבוצת נתוני הבדיקות הרשמית.', 'bo': 'འདིས་གྲངས་འདིས་CitiusNLP team་གིས་SemEval 2018 Task 10 ལ་འཇུག་བྱས་པའི་གྲུབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་འཇུག་སྒྲིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཚོགས་རྣམས་ཀྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དུ་རྟེན་འདུག དེ་ལས་ཕར་ཆེ་བ་མཚོན་ན། ཐབས་ལམ་གྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་གྱི་ཚིག་རྣམ་པ་གཙང་དག་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས མ་ལག་གི་སྣེ་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་དུས་ངེས་པར་ཆས་གཞི་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་སྐབས་ལྟར་ཉེན་མཐའ་ཉེན་རྐྱེན'}
{'en': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Capturing Discriminative Attributes with MLP-CNN model', 'ar': 'THU_NGN في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: التقاط السمات التمييزية باستخدام نموذج MLP-CNN', 'fr': 'THU_NGN à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 10\xa0: Capture des attributs discriminants avec le modèle MLP-CNN', 'es': 'THU_NGN en la Tarea 10 de SemEval-2018: Captura de atributos discriminativos con el modelo MLP-CNN', 'pt': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Capturando Atributos Discriminativos com o modelo MLP-CNN', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク10: MLP - CNNモデルでの判別属性のキャプチャでのTHU_NGN', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018äş‹10č€…THU_NGN:ä»ĄMLP-CNNä¸şćł•', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर THU_NGN: MLP-CNN मॉडल के साथ भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं पर कब्जा करना', 'ru': 'THU_NGN на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Захват дискриминационных атрибутов с помощью модели MLP-CNN', 'ga': 'THU_NGN ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil le múnla MLP-CNN', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών με μοντέλο εργασίας', 'ka': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 Task 10: დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტები MLP-CNN მოდელთან დაკავშირება', 'hu': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 10: diszkriminatív attribútumok rögzítése MLP-CNN modellel', 'kk': 'THU_NGN at semiEval-2018 Task 10: Discriminative Attributes with MLP-CNN model', 'it': 'THU_NGN a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Catturare attributi discriminatori con il modello MLP-CNN', 'mk': 'THU_NGN на SemEval-2018 задача 10: Фаќање дискриминативни атрибути со MLP-CNN модел', 'ms': 'THU_NGN pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif dengan model MLP-CNN', 'mn': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Discriminate Attributes with MLP-CNN model', 'mt': 'THU_NGN f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 10: Qbid ta’ Attributi Diskriminattivi bil-mudell MLP-CNN', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10-ല്\u200d THU_ NGN: MLP-CNN മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഡിസ്കിമിനിറ്റീവിന്റെ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നു', 'no': 'THU_NGN på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 10: Ta med diskriminate attributt med MLP-CNN-modell', 'lt': 'THU_NGN 2010 m. puslapyje 10 užduotis: nustatyti diskriminacinius požymius naudojant MLP-CNN model į', 'pl': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Przechwytywanie dyskryminacyjnych atrybutów za pomocą modelu MLP-CNN', 'ro': 'THU_NGN la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii cu modelul MLP-CNN', 'si': 'THU_NGN at semeval-2018 Job 10: Capture discriminative Attibutes with MLP-CNN Model', 'sr': 'THU_NGN na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 10: uhvatiti diskriminativne atribute sa modelom MLP-CNN', 'so': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes with MLP-CNN model', 'sv': 'THU_NGN på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Fånga diskriminerande attribut med MLP-CNN-modellen', 'ur': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminate Attributes with MLP-CNN model', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018ல் THU_ NGN பணி 10: MLP- CNN மாதிரியுடன் கைப்பற்றுகிறது', 'uz': 'SemEval-2018 vazifa 10: MLP-CNN modeli bilan diqqaqlash atributlarni qabul qilish', 'vi': 'Báo NGN tại SemEvl-208 Task 10: Bắt được những kí hiệu riêng với mô hình MLP-CNN', 'hr': 'THU_NGN na pola Evala-2018 zadatak 10: uhvatiti diskriminativne atribute sa modelom MLP-CNN', 'da': 'THU_NGN på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Optagelse af diskriminerende attributter med MLP-CNN model', 'id': 'THU_NGN di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif dengan model MLP-CNN', 'ko': 'THU NGN이 SemEval-18 작업 10: MLP-CNN 모델로 구분 속성 스냅', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Заснемане на дискриминационни атрибути с модела', 'fa': 'THU_NGN در ماموریت ۱۰-۲۰۱۸: دستگیر کردن ویژه\u200cهای جدایی با مدل MLP-CNN', 'nl': 'THU_NGN op SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Het vastleggen van discriminerende attributen met MLP-CNN model', 'tr': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes with MLP-CNN model', 'de': 'THU_NGN auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute mit MLP-CNN Modell', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'hy': 'THU_NgN-ը, 2018-ի կիսագնդի 10-ի գործում. Դիսկրմինատիվ առանձնահատկություններ բռնելը MLP-CNN մոդելի միջոցով', 'az': 'THU_NGN at semiEval-2018 Task 10: Discriminativ Attributes Capturing with MLP-CNN model', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের থিউ_এনজি: এমএলপি-সিএনএন মডেলের সাথে বৈষম্যিক বৈষম্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য গ্রহণ করা হচ্ছে', 'sw': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes with MLP-CNN model', 'af': 'THU_NGN by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 10: Opneem diskriminieerde eienskappe met MLP-CNN model', 'bs': 'THU_NGN na semiEval-2018 zadatku 10: uhvatiti diskriminativne atribute sa modelom MLP-CNN', 'ca': 'THU_NGN a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturar atributs discriminatoris amb model MLP-CNN', 'cs': 'Úkol 10: Zachycení diskriminačních atributů pomocí MLP-CNN modelu', 'sq': 'THU_NGN në SemEval-2018 Task 10: Kapja e atributeve diskriminuese me modelin MLP-CNN', 'et': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 10: Diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamine MLP-CNN mudeliga', 'fi': 'THU_NGN SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Syrjinnyttävien attribuuttien kaappaaminen MLP-CNN-mallilla', 'jv': 'thoU_NGN at semi-2008 task 10: Capture Diskrim nate Attribute with MLP-MTmodel', 'sk': 'THU_NGN na SemEval-2018 Naloga 10: Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov z modelom MLP-CNN', 'he': 'THU_NGN ב SemEval-2018 משימה 10: תפיסת תוויות דיסקרמינציות עם מודל MLP-CNN', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'THU_NGN at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes with MLP-CNN model'}
{'en': 'Existing semantic models are capable of identifying the semantic similarity of words. However, it’s hard for these models to discriminate between a word and another similar word. Thus, the aim of SemEval-2018 Task 10 is to predict whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two concepts. In this task, we apply a multilayer perceptron (MLP)-convolutional neural network (CNN) model to identify whether an attribute is discriminative. The CNNs are used to extract low-level features from the inputs. The MLP takes both the flatten CNN maps and inputs to predict the labels. The evaluation F-score of our system on the test set is 0.629 (ranked 15th), which indicates that our system still needs to be improved. However, the behaviours of our system in our experiments provide useful information, which can help to improve the collective understanding of this novel task.', 'ar': 'النماذج الدلالية الحالية قادرة على تحديد التشابه الدلالي للكلمات. ومع ذلك ، يصعب على هذه النماذج التمييز بين كلمة وكلمة أخرى مماثلة. وبالتالي ، فإن الهدف من SemEval-2018 Task 10 هو التنبؤ بما إذا كانت الكلمة سمة تمييزية بين مفهومين. في هذه المهمة ، نطبق نموذج الشبكة العصبية التوافقية (CNN) متعدد الطبقات (MLP) لتحديد ما إذا كانت السمة تمييزية. تُستخدم شبكات CNN لاستخراج ميزات منخفضة المستوى من المدخلات. يأخذ MLP كل من خرائط ومدخلات CNN المسطحة للتنبؤ بالتسميات. درجة تقييم نظامنا في مجموعة الاختبار هي 0.629 (المرتبة 15) ، مما يشير إلى أن نظامنا لا يزال بحاجة إلى التحسين. ومع ذلك ، فإن سلوكيات نظامنا في تجاربنا توفر معلومات مفيدة ، والتي يمكن أن تساعد في تحسين الفهم الجماعي لهذه المهمة الجديدة.', 'pt': 'Os modelos semânticos existentes são capazes de identificar a semelhança semântica das palavras. No entanto, é difícil para esses modelos discriminar entre uma palavra e outra palavra semelhante. Assim, o objetivo da Tarefa 10 do SemEval-2018 é prever se uma palavra é um atributo discriminativo entre dois conceitos. Nesta tarefa, aplicamos um modelo de rede neural convolucional (CNN) multilayer perceptron (MLP) para identificar se um atributo é discriminativo. As CNNs são usadas para extrair características de baixo nível das entradas. O MLP usa os mapas e as entradas achatadas da CNN para prever os rótulos. A avaliação F-score do nosso sistema no conjunto de teste é 0,629 (15º classificado), o que indica que nosso sistema ainda precisa ser melhorado. No entanto, os comportamentos do nosso sistema em nossos experimentos fornecem informações úteis, que podem ajudar a melhorar a compreensão coletiva dessa nova tarefa.', 'es': 'Los modelos semánticos existentes son capaces de identificar la similitud semántica de las palabras. Sin embargo, es difícil para estos modelos discriminar entre una palabra y otra similar. Por lo tanto, el objetivo de la Tarea 10 de SemEval-2018 es predecir si una palabra es un atributo discriminatorio entre dos conceptos. En esta tarea, aplicamos un modelo de red neuronal convolucional (CNN) de perceptrones multicapa (MLP) para identificar si un atributo es discriminativo. Las CNN se utilizan para extraer características de bajo nivel de las entradas. El MLP toma tanto los mapas de CNN aplanados como las entradas para predecir las etiquetas. La puntuación F de evaluación de nuestro sistema en el conjunto de pruebas es de 0,629 (en el puesto 15), lo que indica que nuestro sistema aún debe mejorarse. Sin embargo, los comportamientos de nuestro sistema en nuestros experimentos proporcionan información útil, que puede ayudar a mejorar la comprensión colectiva de esta novedosa tarea.', 'fr': "Les modèles sémantiques existants sont capables d'identifier la similitude sémantique des mots. Cependant, il est difficile pour ces modèles de faire la distinction entre un mot et un autre mot similaire. Ainsi, l'objectif de SEMEVAL-2018 Task 10 est de prédire si un mot est un attribut discriminant entre deux concepts. Dans cette tâche, nous appliquons un modèle de réseau neuronal convolutionnel (CNN) perceptron multicouche (MLP) pour déterminer si un attribut est discriminant. Les CNN sont utilisés pour extraire des caractéristiques de bas niveau à partir des entrées. Le MLP prend à la fois les cartes CNN aplaties et les entrées pour prédire les étiquettes. Le score F d'évaluation de notre système sur l'ensemble de test est de 0,629 (classé 15e), ce qui indique que notre système doit encore être amélioré. Cependant, les comportements de notre système dans nos expériences fournissent des informations utiles qui peuvent aider à améliorer la compréhension collective de cette nouvelle tâche.", 'ja': '既存の意味モデルは、単語の意味的類似性を識別することができる。しかし、これらのモデルが単語と他の類似の単語を区別することは難しい。したがって、SemEval -2018タスク10の目的は、単語が2つの概念間の識別属性であるかどうかを予測することです。このタスクでは、多層パーセプトロン（ MLP ）-畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）モデルを適用して、属性が識別可能かどうかを識別します。CNNは、入力から低レベルの機能を抽出するために使用されます。MLPは、フラット化されたCNNマップと入力の両方を使用してラベルを予測します。試験器の当社システムの評価Fスコアは0.629 （ 15位）であり、当社システムの改善がまだ必要であることを示しています。しかし、私たちの実験におけるシステムの挙動は有用な情報を提供し、この新しいタスクの集合的な理解を向上させるのに役立ちます。', 'zh': '今之语义模,识单词之语义相似性。 然难别一单词,与一类单词。 故SemEval-2018务10者,一也单词非二名之分也。 以此知之感知器 (MLP)-卷积神经网络 (CNN) 形以知性。 CNN 以从输中提取下级特征。 MLP 用合 CNN 映输以占之。 吾之系统于试集上之评估F分为0.629(排名第15位),明吾统犹有待改进也。 然而实验之行,有以也,有助于务也。', 'hi': 'मौजूदा शब्दार्थ मॉडल शब्दों की शब्दार्थ समानता की पहचान करने में सक्षम हैं। हालांकि, इन मॉडलों के लिए एक शब्द और एक अन्य समान शब्द के बीच भेदभाव करना मुश्किल है। इस प्रकार, SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 का उद्देश्य यह अनुमान लगाना है कि क्या कोई शब्द दो अवधारणाओं के बीच एक भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषता है। इस कार्य में, हम एक बहुस्तरीय परसेप्ट्रॉन (एमएलपी) लागू करते हैं - कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) मॉडल यह पहचानने के लिए कि क्या कोई विशेषता भेदभावपूर्ण है। CNN का उपयोग इनपुट से निम्न-स्तरीय सुविधाओं को निकालने के लिए किया जाता है। एमएलपी लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए चपटा सीएनएन मानचित्र और इनपुट दोनों लेता है। परीक्षण सेट पर हमारे सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन एफ-स्कोर 0.629 (15 वें स्थान पर) है, जो इंगित करता है कि हमारे सिस्टम को अभी भी सुधारने की आवश्यकता है। हालांकि, हमारे प्रयोगों में हमारे सिस्टम के व्यवहार उपयोगी जानकारी प्रदान करते हैं, जो इस उपन्यास कार्य की सामूहिक समझ में सुधार करने में मदद कर सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Существующие семантические модели способны идентифицировать семантическое сходство слов. Однако этим моделям трудно отличить одно слово от другого аналогичного слова. Таким образом, цель задачи 10 SemEval-2018 состоит в том, чтобы предсказать, является ли слово дискриминационным атрибутом между двумя понятиями. В этой задаче мы применяем модель сверточной нейронной сети (CNN) с многослойным персептроном (MLP), чтобы определить, является ли тот или иной атрибут дискриминационным. CNN используются для извлечения низкоуровневых характеристик из входных данных. MLP принимает и плоские карты CNN и входные данные для того чтобы предсказать метки. Оценка F-оценка нашей системы на тестовом наборе составляет 0,629 (15-е место), что указывает на то, что наша система все еще нуждается в улучшении. Однако поведение нашей системы в наших экспериментах дает полезную информацию, которая может помочь улучшить коллективное понимание этой новой задачи.', 'ga': "Tá na samhlacha shéimeantacha atá ann cheana féin in ann cosúlacht shéimeantach na bhfocal a aithint. Mar sin féin, tá sé deacair do na múnlaí seo idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir focal agus focal eile cosúil leis. Mar sin, is é aidhm Tasc 10 SemEval-2018 a thuar cé acu an tréith idirdhealaitheach idir dhá choincheap é focal. Sa tasc seo, cuirimid samhail néarlíonra comhraonta (CNN) ilchiseal perceptron (MLP) i bhfeidhm chun a aithint an bhfuil tréith idirdhealaitheach. Úsáidtear na CNNanna chun gnéithe ísealleibhéil a bhaint as na hionchuir. Tógann an MLP na léarscáileanna cothromaithe CNN agus na hionchuir chun na lipéid a thuar. Is é 0.629 (rangaithe 15ú) an scór-F meastóireachta ar ár gcóras ar an tacar tástála, rud a léiríonn go bhfuil gá fós lenár gcóras a fheabhsú. Mar sin féin, cuireann iompraíochtaí ár gcóras inár dturgnaimh faisnéis úsáideach ar fáil, rud a d'fhéadfadh cabhrú le tuiscint chomhchoiteann an tasc nua seo a fheabhsú.", 'hu': 'A meglévő szemantikai modellek képesek azonosítani a szavak szemantikai hasonlóságát. Ezeknek a modelleknek azonban nehéz különbséget tenniük egy szó és egy másik hasonló szó között. Ezért a SemEval-2018 Task 10 célja, hogy megjósolja, hogy egy szó két fogalom között diszkriminatív attribútumot jelent-e. Ebben a feladatban többrétegű perceptron (MLP)-convolucionális neurális hálózat (CNN) modellt alkalmazunk annak meghatározására, hogy egy attribútum diszkriminatív-e. A CNN-eket az alacsony szintű funkciók kivonására használják a bemenetekből. Az MLP mind a lapos CNN térképeket, mind a bemeneteket veszi a címkék előrejelzéséhez. Rendszerünk F-pontszáma a tesztkészleten 0,629 (15. helyezés), ami azt jelzi, hogy rendszerünket még fejleszteni kell. Rendszerünk viselkedése azonban kísérleteinkben hasznos információkat szolgáltat, amelyek segíthetnek javítani ennek az új feladatnak a kollektív megértésében.', 'ka': 'Existing semantic models are capable of identifying the semantic similarity of words. მაგრამ ეს მოდელების დისკრიმინაცია სიტყვის და სხვა სხვა სიტყვის შორის. ამიტომ, სამუშაო-2018 დავალების მიზეზი 10 არის წარმოდგინოთ თუ სიტყვა დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტი ორი კონცექტის შორის. ამ დავალებში, ჩვენ მრავალური ინტერპონტრონი (MLP)-კონვალუციონალური ნეიროლური ქსელი (CNN) მოდელის გამოყენება განსაზღვრებისთვის თუ არibრიტი დისკრიმინალურია CNNs გამოყენება ჩანაწერებიდან ცოტა დონე ფუნქციების გამოყენება. MLP იყენებს ორივე მუშაობი CNN-ის კაპრატები და მონაცემები, რომ წინასწარმოდგინოთ ლაბეტები. ჩვენი სისტემის F-სოფტის შესაბამისი ტესტის სოფტი არის 0,629 (პრენტი 15), რომელიც მინდომას, რომ ჩვენი სისტემის შესაბამისი უნდა იყოს. მაგრამ ჩვენი სისტემის ქცევები ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტებში გამოყენებული ინფორმაცია, რომელიც შეუძლია დახმარება ამ პრომენტის საკუთარი პასუხის კოლექტური გა', 'el': 'Τα υπάρχοντα σημασιολογικά μοντέλα είναι σε θέση να προσδιορίσουν τη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα των λέξεων. Ωστόσο, είναι δύσκολο για αυτά τα μοντέλα να διακρίνουν μια λέξη από μια άλλη παρόμοια λέξη. Έτσι, ο στόχος του έργου 10 είναι να προβλέψει εάν μια λέξη είναι ένα διακριτικό χαρακτηριστικό μεταξύ δύο εννοιών. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εφαρμόζουμε ένα μοντέλο πολυπροπολικού νευρωνικού δικτύου (ΚΝΝ) για να προσδιορίσουμε αν ένα χαρακτηριστικό είναι διακριτικό. Τα CNN χρησιμοποιούνται για την εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών χαμηλού επιπέδου από τις εισόδους. Το MLP λαμβάνει τόσο τους ισοπεδωμένους χάρτες CNN όσο και τις εισόδους για να προβλέψει τις ετικέτες. Η βαθμολογία αξιολόγησης του συστήματός μας στο σετ δοκιμών είναι 0.629 (κατάταξη 15η), γεγονός που δείχνει ότι το σύστημά μας πρέπει ακόμα να βελτιωθεί. Ωστόσο, οι συμπεριφορές του συστήματός μας στα πειράματά μας παρέχουν χρήσιμες πληροφορίες, οι οποίες μπορούν να βοηθήσουν στη βελτίωση της συλλογικής κατανόησης αυτού του νέου έργου.', 'it': "I modelli semantici esistenti sono in grado di identificare la somiglianza semantica delle parole. Tuttavia, è difficile per questi modelli discriminare tra una parola e un'altra parola simile. Pertanto, lo scopo di SemEval-2018 Task 10 è quello di prevedere se una parola è un attributo discriminatorio tra due concetti. In questo compito, applichiamo un modello di rete neurale convoluzionale (CNN) per identificare se un attributo è discriminatorio. Le CNN sono utilizzate per estrarre funzionalità di basso livello dagli ingressi. L'MLP prende sia le mappe piatte della CNN che gli input per prevedere le etichette. Il punteggio F di valutazione del nostro sistema sul set di test è di 0,629 (classificato 15esimo), il che indica che il nostro sistema deve ancora essere migliorato. Tuttavia, i comportamenti del nostro sistema nei nostri esperimenti forniscono informazioni utili, che possono aiutare a migliorare la comprensione collettiva di questo nuovo compito.", 'lt': 'Esami semantiniai modeliai gali nustatyti semantinį žodžių panašumą. Tačiau šiems modeliams sunku diskriminuoti žodį ir kitą panašų žodį. Taigi, 2010 m. SemEval-2018 10 užduoties tikslas – numatyti, ar žodis yra dviejų sąvokų diskriminacinis požymis. Šiame uždavinyje naudojame daugiasluoksnį perceptrono (MLP) konvoliucinio nervinio tinklo (CNN) model į, kad nustatytume, ar požymis yra diskriminacinis. CNN naudojami mažo lygio savybėms ištraukti iš žaliavų. Kad būtų galima prognozuoti etiketes, MLP naudoja lygius CNN žemėlapius ir įvedimus. Mūsų sistemos F vertinimo rezultatas bandymų rinkinyje yra 0,629 (15 laipsnio), o tai rodo, kad mūsų sistema vis dar turi būti patobulinta. However, the behaviours of our system in our experiments provide useful information, which can help to improve the collective understanding of this novel task.', 'kk': 'Бар семантикалық үлгілер сөздердің семантикалық ұқсастығын анықтай алады. Бірақ бұл үлгілер сөз мен ұқсас сөз арасындағы айырмашылық. Осылайша, 10- жарым Eval- 2018 тапсырмасының мақсаты - сөз екі концепциясының арасындағы дискриминациялық атрибуттығын көрсету. Бұл тапсырманың бірнеше қабатты түсініктемесін (MLP)-қосымша невралдық желі (CNN) үлгісін таңдап, атрибуттың дискриминациялығын анықтау үшін қолданамыз. Кірісінен төмен деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктерді тарқату үшін CNN қолданылады. MLP сәйкес CNN карталарын және жарлықтарды алдын ала алады. Сынақтағы жүйеміздің F- нәтижесін бағалау 0, 629 (15- нәтижесі), жүйеміздің жақсарту керектігін көрсетеді. Бірақ жүйеміздің тәжірибелерімізде тәжірибелеріміз пайдалы мәлімет береді. Бұл романдық тапсырманы біріктіру үшін көмектеседі.', 'mk': 'Existing semantic models are capable of identifying the semantic similarity of words.  Сепак, тешко е за овие модели да дискриминираат меѓу збор и друг сличен збор. Затоа, целта на SemEval-2018 задачата 10 е да предвиде дали зборот е дискриминативен атрибут помеѓу двата концепти. Во оваа задача, применуваме мултислоевен перцептрон (MLP)-конволуционален нервен мрежа (CNN) модел за идентификување дали атрибутот е дискриминативен. ЦНН се користат за извлекување на ниско ниво карактеристики од внесувањата. MLP ги зема и рамните мапи и влози на CNN за да ги предвидат етикетите. Evaluation F-score of our system on the test set is 0.629 (ranked 15th), which indicates that our system still needs to be improved. Сепак, однесувањата на нашиот систем во нашите експерименти обезбедуваат корисни информации, кои можат да помогнат во подобрувањето на колективното разбирање на оваа нова задача.', 'ml': "നിലവിലുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d However, it's hard for these models to discriminate between a word and another similar word.  അതുകൊണ്ട്, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ടാസ്ക് 10 എന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം രണ്ട് ആശയങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യാസം ആണോ എന്ന് പ്ര ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മള്\u200dട്ടിലേയര്\u200d പെപ്പെട്ടെട്രോന്\u200d (എംഎല്\u200dപി)-ക്രമീകരണ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും കുറഞ്ഞ നില വിശേഷതകള്\u200d എടുക്കാന്\u200d CNNNs ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. എംഎംഎല്\u200dപി ഫ്ലാറ്റ് സിഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200d എംഎം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എ ടെസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ F-സ്കോര്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് 0. 629 (15th Ranked), അത് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന എന്നാലും നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിലെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകൃതികള്\u200d പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഈ നോവല്\u200d ജോല", 'ms': 'Existing semantic models are capable of identifying the semantic similarity of words.  Bagaimanapun, ia sukar untuk model ini untuk membezakan antara perkataan dan perkataan yang sama lain. Oleh itu, tujuan SemEval-2018 Task 10 adalah untuk meramalkan sama ada perkataan adalah atribut diskriminatif diantara dua konsep. Dalam tugas ini, kami melaksanakan model rangkaian saraf konvolusi (CNN) berbilang lapisan untuk mengenalpasti sama ada atribut adalah diskriminatif. CNN digunakan untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri aras rendah dari input. MLP mengambil kedua-dua peta CNN rata dan input untuk meramalkan label. Nilai F-skor sistem kita pada set ujian adalah 0.629 (peringkat ke-15), yang menunjukkan bahawa sistem kita masih perlu diperbaiki. Namun, perilaku sistem kita dalam eksperimen kita memberikan maklumat berguna, yang boleh membantu untuk meningkatkan pemahaman kolektif tugas novel ini.', 'mt': 'Existing semantic models are capable of identifying the semantic similarity of words.  Madankollu, huwa diffiċli għal dawn il-mudelli li jiddiskriminaw bejn kelma u kelma simili oħra. Għalhekk, l-għan tas-SemEval-2018 Task 10 huwa li jipprevedi jekk kelma hijiex attribut diskriminatorju bejn żewġ kunċetti. F’dan il-kompitu, a ħna napplikaw mudell ta’ perċepton multisaff (MLP)-netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali (CNN) biex nidentifikaw jekk attribut huwiex diskriminatorju. Is-CNNs jintużaw biex jiġu estratti karatteristiċi ta’ livell baxx mill-inputs. L-MLP jieħu kemm il-mapep ċatti tas-CNN kif ukoll l-inputs biex jipprevedi t-tikketti. Il-punteġġ F tal-evalwazzjoni tas-sistema tagħna fuq is-sett tat-test huwa 0.629 (il-15-il grad), li jindika li s-sistema tagħna għad trid tittejjeb. Madankollu, l-imġibiet tas-sistema tagħna fl-esperimenti tagħna jipprovdu informazzjoni utli, li tista’ tgħin biex jittejjeb il-fehim kollettiv ta’ dan il-kompitu ġdid.', 'no': 'Det eksisterande semantiske modeller kan identifisera semantiske liknande ord. Det er likevel vanskeleg for desse modelane å diskriminere mellom eit ord og eit anna liknande ord. Målet av halvEval-2018 oppgåve 10 er å foregå om eit ord er ein diskriminasjonalt attributt mellom to konseptar. I denne oppgåva brukar vi eit fleire lag-oppfatting (MLP)-konvolusjonell neuralnettverk (CNN) modell for å identifisera om ein attributt er diskriminativ. CNNs vert brukt for å pakka ut låg nivåfunksjonar frå inndata. MLP tar både dei flate CNN-karta og inndata for å foregå merkelappene. Evalueringa F-poeng på systemet vårt på testsettet er 0,629 (rankert 15), som tyder på at systemet vårt fortsatt må vera forbetra. Dette gjer imidlertid oppføringane i systemet våre i eksperimentene våre nyttig informasjon, som kan hjelpa til å forbedra samlinga av denne romanoppgåva.', 'pl': 'Istniejące modele semantyczne są w stanie zidentyfikować semantyczne podobieństwo słów. Jednak tym modelom trudno jest rozróżnić słowo od innego podobnego słowa. Celem zadania SemEval-2018 10 jest zatem przewidzenie, czy słowo jest atrybutem dyskryminacyjnym pomiędzy dwoma pojęciami. W tym zadaniu stosujemy wielowarstwowy model perzeptronowy (MLP)-konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej (CNN), aby zidentyfikować, czy atrybut jest dyskryminacyjny. CNN są używane do wyodrębniania cech niskiego poziomu z wejść. MLP wykorzystuje zarówno spłaszczone mapy CNN, jak i wejścia do przewidywania etykiet. Ocena F-score naszego systemu na zestawie testowym wynosi 0.629 (klasyfikacja 15-ta), co wskazuje, że nasz system nadal trzeba ulepszyć. Jednak zachowania naszego systemu w naszych eksperymentach dostarczają użytecznych informacji, które mogą pomóc w poprawie zbiorowego zrozumienia tego nowego zadania.', 'ro': 'Modelele semantice existente sunt capabile să identifice similitudinea semantică a cuvintelor. Cu toate acestea, este greu pentru aceste modele să discrimineze între un cuvânt și un alt cuvânt similar. Astfel, scopul SemEval-2018 Task 10 este de a prezice dacă un cuvânt este un atribut discriminatoriu între două concepte. În această sarcină, aplicăm un model de rețea neuronală convoluțională (CNN) pentru a identifica dacă un atribut este discriminatoriu. CNN-urile sunt utilizate pentru a extrage caracteristici de nivel scăzut din intrări. MLP ia atât hărțile plat CNN, cât și intrările pentru a prezice etichetele. Evaluarea F-scorului sistemului nostru pe setul de teste este de 0,629 (clasat 15), ceea ce indică faptul că sistemul nostru trebuie încă îmbunătățit. Cu toate acestea, comportamentele sistemului nostru în experimentele noastre oferă informații utile, care pot ajuta la îmbunătățirea înțelegerii colective a acestei sarcini noi.', 'mn': 'Бас оршиж байгаа semantic загварууд үгний төстэй ижил хэлбэрийг тодорхойлж чадна. Гэхдээ эдгээр загваруудыг нэг үг болон нэг төстэй үг хоорондоо ялгах нь хэцүү. Тэгэхээр SemEval-2018 Task 10-ийн зорилго нь үг хоёр ойлголтын хоорондын ялгаатай харьцуулалт эсэхийг тодорхойлох юм. Энэ үйл ажилд бид олон давхар ойлголт (MLP)-хоорондын мэдрэлийн сүлжээ (CNN) загварыг ашиглаж харуулахын тулд харилцаа ялгаатай эсэхийг тодорхойлдог. ДНХ нь бага хэмжээний чадваруудыг орноос гаргахад хэрэглэгддэг. MLP нь тэмдэглэгдсэн CNN газрын зурагт хоёуланг ашиглаж, тэмдэглэгддэг. Тест хэмжээнд бидний системийн F-score нь 0.629 (15-р дүрс) юм. Энэ нь бидний системийг сайжруулах хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг. Гэхдээ бидний туршилтын системийн үйлдэл нь хэрэгтэй мэдээлэл өгдөг. Энэ нь шинэ зохиолын нийгмийн ойлголтыг сайжруулахад тусалдаг.', 'sr': 'Postojeći semantički modeli su sposobni da identifikuju semantičku sličnost riječi. Međutim, za te modele je teško diskriminirati riječ i sličnu riječ. Zato je cilj zadatka 10 od pola Evala-2018 predviđati je li reč diskriminacijski atribut između dva koncepta. U ovom zadatku, primjenjujemo model multilayer perceptron (MLP)-konvolucionalne neuralne mreže (CNN) za identifikaciju da li je atribut diskriminiran. CNN se koristi za izvlačenje nižeg nivoa karakteristika iz ulaza. MLP uzima i ravne CNN mape i ulaze da predvidi etikete. Procjenjivanje F-rezultata našeg sistema na testnom setu je 0,629 (redovno 15), što ukazuje na to da naš sistem još uvek mora biti poboljšan. Međutim, ponašanje našeg sistema u našim eksperimentima pruža korisne informacije, što može pomoći da poboljša kolektivno razumevanje ovog novog zadatka.', 'si': 'ඉතින් ඉතින් සෙමාන්ටික් මෝඩේල්ස් වචන වගේ සෙමාන්ටික් වර්ගයක් හඳුන්න පුළුවන්. නමුත්, මේ මොඩල් එක්ක වචනයක් සහ වගේ වචනයක් අතර වෙනස් කරන්න අමාරුයි. ඉතින්, සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 10 ගේ අරමුණ තමයි වචන දෙකක් අතර විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්ද කියලා. මේ වැඩේ අපි ගොඩක් ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරතිකෘතිය (MLP)-සම්පූර්ණයෙන් න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (CNN) මොඩේලයක් ඇතුළත් කරනවා විශේෂ CNNs ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘතියෙන් අඩු ස්තූතිය අවශ්\u200dයය නිකාලන්න භාවිත වෙනවා. MLP දෙන්නම් CNN මැප් එක්ක සහ ලේබල් එක්ක අනතුරු කරන්න. අපේ පරීක්ෂණ සැටේ පරීක්ෂණයේ F-ස්කෝර් විශ්ලේෂණය 0.629 (පරීක්ෂණය 15) කියලා, ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය තවමත් වැඩ නමුත්, අපේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තොරතුරු දෙන්න පුළුවන් තොරතුරු දෙන්න, ඒකෙන්', 'so': 'Tusaale qayb ah oo heysta waxay awoodaan in ay aqoonsadaan isku mid ah hadalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee way adag tahay in qaababkan lagu kala takooro hadal kale iyo hadal kale oo isku mid ah. Sidaa darteed waxaa loola jeedaa shaqada 10 ee SemEval-2018 in uu soo sheegayo in ereygu uu yahay takoor labada fikir u dhexeeya. Shaqadan waxaynu ku codsanaynaa muusikada shabakadda kooxaha ah (MLP) oo kala duduwan (CNN) si a an u caddeyno in uu takooriso iyo in kale. CNNs waxaa loo isticmaalaa in laga soo saaraa midibta heerka hoose. MLP wuxuu qaadaa kartooyinka CNN ee bannaan iyo tartanka si uu uga hor tago alaabta. Qiimeynta F-scorta nidaamka ku qoran imtixaanka waa 0.629 (qiyaasta 15aad), taasoo looga jeedaa in systemkeenu weli loo baahan yahay in la beddelo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee dabeecada nidaamka jirrabaadeena waxay bixiyaan macluumaad faa’iido leh, kaas oo caawinaya inuu hagaajiyo garashada iskuulka ah ee shaqada safarka.', 'sv': 'Befintliga semantiska modeller kan identifiera ordens semantiska likhet. Det är dock svårt för dessa modeller att skilja mellan ett ord och ett annat liknande ord. Syftet med SemEval-2018 Task 10 är således att förutsäga om ett ord är ett diskriminerande attribut mellan två begrepp. I den här uppgiften använder vi en multilayer perceptron (MLP)-konvulutional neural network (CNN)-modell för att identifiera om ett attribut är diskriminerande. CNN används för att extrahera lågnivåfunktioner från ingångarna. MLP tar både de platta CNN-kartorna och ingångarna för att förutsäga etiketterna. Utvärderingen F-poäng för vårt system på testset är 0,629 (rankad 15:e), vilket indikerar att vårt system fortfarande behöver förbättras. Men beteendet i vårt system i våra experiment ger användbar information, vilket kan bidra till att förbättra den kollektiva förståelsen av denna nya uppgift.', 'ta': 'இருக்கும் semantic models are capable of identifying the semantic similarity of words. ஆனால், இந்த மாதிரிகளுக்கு மிகவும் கடினமாக ஒரு வார்த்தையும் மற்றொரு போன்ற வார்த்தையும் இடையே வேறுபட எனவே, SemEval-2018 பணி 10 என்பது இரண்டு கருத்துக்களுக்கிடையில் ஒரு வார்த்தை வித்தியாசமான குணங்கள் என்று பார்க்க வேண்டும். இந்த செயலில், நாம் பல்லையேயர் பார்வையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் ( MLP) சாதாரண பிணையமான பாதுகாப்பு (CNN) மாதிரி பாதையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் ஒரு  உள்ளீடுகளிலிருந்து குறைந்த மட்டத்தின் பண்புகளை வெளியேற்ற CNNNs பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. The MLP takes both the flatten CNN maps and inputs to predict the labels.  பரிசோதனை அமைப்பின் F- score evaluation is 0. 629 (ranked 15வது) அது எங்கள் கணினியை இன்னும் மேம்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்று குறிப்பிடுகிறது. எனினும், எங்கள் சோதனைகளில் எங்கள் கணினியின் நடத்தைகள் பயனுள்ள தகவல்களை கொடுக்கிறது, இது இந்த புதிய பணியின் சேகரிப்பு புரிந', 'ur': 'Existing semantic models are capable of identifying the semantic similarity of words. اگرچہ، یہ مدلس کے لئے ایک کلمہ اور دوسری کلمہ کے درمیان جدائی کرنے کا مشکل ہے. اسی طرح، نصف Eval-2018 Task 10 کا موقع یہ ہے کہ پیش بینی کرنا چاہے کہ ایک کلام دو نظریوں کے درمیان تقسیم کرنے والی ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک multilayer perceptron (MLP)-convolutional neural network (CNN) موڈل کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے لازم کر رہے ہیں کہ ایک گواہ جدائی ہے. CNNs اینپوٹ سے نیچے سطح کے فائدے اٹھانے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. MLP ان دونوں فلٹن سی ان نقشه کو لے تا ہے اور لیبلوں کو پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے وارد کرتا ہے. آزمائش سٹ پر ہمارے سیسٹم کا ارزش F-score 0.629 ہے (رقم 15م) جو نشان دیتا ہے کہ ہماری سیسٹم ابھی بھی بہتر ہو جانے کی ضرورت ہے. ہرگز نہیں، ہماری آزمائش میں ہمارے سیستم کا رفتار فائدہ معلومات دے سکتا ہے، جو اس روانی کے کام کی جمع سمجھنے کے لئے مدد کر سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Mavjud semantik modellari so'zlarning semantik tilligini aniqlash mumkin. Lekin, bu modellarni so'z va boshqa so'zning orasidan bir so'zni ajratish juda qiyin. Shunday qilib, SemEval-2018 Vazifa 10 so'zi ikkita fikrlar orasidagi ajratilgan holatni predikt qilishi mumkin. Bu vazifanda, biz bir necha tarmoqni (MLP) murakkab neyron tarmoqni (CNN) foydalanamiz. Atributni aniqlash imkoniyatini aniqlash uchun. The CNNs are used to extract low-level features from the inputs.  Name Tizimmizning F- scori qiymati sinov sohasida 0.629 (15- chi qiymati), bu tizimmizning hamisha o'zgarishga kerak. Lekin bizning tizimimizning xususiyatlarimiz foydali maʼlumot beradi. Bu novel vazifasini birlashtirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình ngữ pháp hiện thời có khả năng xác định nét giống nhau của từ. Tuy nhiên, khó cho các mô hình này phân biệt giữa một từ và một từ tương tự. Mục đích của nhiệm vụ SemEvol 10 là dự đoán nếu một từ là một dấu hiệu phân biệt giữa hai khái niệm. Trong nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi áp dụng một mô hình dây thần kinh bao đa lớp nhiều phát phát nhiều (MLP) để xác định xem khả năng phân biệt thuộc tính chất hay không. Các đài CNN được dùng để lấy các tính năng cấp thấp từ các nội dung. Giải MLP dùng cả bản đồ CNN phẳng và nhập để dự đoán các nhãn. Bài đánh giá điểm F của hệ thống chúng ta trong bộ thử là 0.69 (phân hạng hấp hối), cho thấy hệ thống của chúng ta vẫn cần được cải tiến. Tuy nhiên, các hành vi của hệ thống trong thí nghiệm cung cấp thông tin hữu ích, có thể giúp cải thiện sự hiểu biết chung về nhiệm vụ mới này.', 'nl': "Bestaande semantische modellen zijn in staat om de semantische gelijkenis van woorden te identificeren. Het is echter moeilijk voor deze modellen om onderscheid te maken tussen een woord en een ander soortgelijk woord. Het doel van SemEval-2018 Task 10 is om te voorspellen of een woord een onderscheidend kenmerk is tussen twee concepten. In deze taak passen we een multilayer perceptron (MLP)-convolutional neural network (CNN) model toe om te bepalen of een attribuut discriminatief is. De CNN's worden gebruikt om low-level functies uit de ingangen te extraheren. De MLP gebruikt zowel de vlakke CNN-kaarten als inputs om de labels te voorspellen. De evaluatie F-score van ons systeem op de testset is 0.629 (15e gerangschikt), wat aangeeft dat ons systeem nog moet worden verbeterd. Het gedrag van ons systeem in onze experimenten levert echter nuttige informatie op, die kan helpen om het collectieve begrip van deze nieuwe taak te verbeteren.", 'bg': 'Съществуващите семантични модели са способни да идентифицират семантичното сходство на думите. Въпреки това, за тези модели е трудно да различават една дума от друга подобна дума. По този начин целта на задача 10 е да предвиди дали дадена дума е дискриминационен атрибут между две понятия. В тази задача ние прилагаме многослоен модел на възприятие (МЛП) - конволюционна невронна мрежа (CNN), за да идентифицираме дали даден атрибут е дискриминиращ. CNN се използват за извличане на ниско ниво функции от входовете. МЛП взема както плоските карти, така и входовете, за да предскаже етикетите. Оценката на нашата система в тестовия комплект е 0.629 (класирана на 15-то място), което показва, че нашата система все още трябва да бъде подобрена. Поведението на нашата система в нашите експерименти обаче предоставя полезна информация, която може да помогне за подобряване на колективното разбиране на тази нова задача.', 'da': "Eksisterende semantiske modeller er i stand til at identificere den semantiske lighed af ord. Men det er svært for disse modeller at skelne mellem et ord og et andet lignende ord. Formålet med SemEval-2018 Task 10 er således at forudsige, om et ord er en diskriminerende egenskab mellem to begreber. I denne opgave anvender vi en multilags perceptron (MLP)-konvulutional neural netværk (CNN) model for at identificere, om en attribut er diskriminerende. CNN'erne bruges til at udtrække funktioner på lavt niveau fra indgangene. MLP tager både de flade CNN kort og input til at forudsige etiketterne. Evalueringen F-score af vores system på testsættet er 0,629 (rangeret 15.), hvilket indikerer, at vores system stadig skal forbedres. Men systemets adfærd i vores eksperimenter giver nyttige oplysninger, som kan bidrage til at forbedre den kollektive forståelse af denne nye opgave.", 'hr': 'Postojeći semantički modeli su sposobni identificirati semantičku sličnost riječi. Međutim, za te modele je teško diskriminirati riječ i sličnu riječ. Stoga je cilj zadatka 10 od pola Evala-2018 predviđati je li riječ diskriminacijski atribut između dva koncepta. U ovom zadatku primjenjujemo model multilayer perceptron (MLP)-konvolucionalne neuralne mreže (CNN) za identifikaciju da li je atribut diskriminiran. CNNs se koristi za izvlačenje znakova niske razine iz ulaza. MLP uzima i ravne CNN mape i ulaze kako bi predvidjela etikete. Procjenjivanje F-rezultata našeg sustava na testovom setu je 0,629 (redovito 15), što ukazuje na to da je naš sustav još uvijek morao biti poboljšan. Međutim, ponašanje našeg sustava u našim eksperimentima pruža korisne informacije, što može pomoći da poboljša kolektivno razumijevanje ovog novog zadatka.', 'id': 'Model semantis yang ada mampu mengidentifikasi persamaan semantis kata-kata. Bagaimanapun, sulit untuk model ini untuk diskriminasi antara satu kata dan kata yang sama lainnya. Jadi, tujuan SemEval-2018 Task 10 adalah untuk memprediksikan apakah kata adalah atribut diskriminatif antara dua konsep. In this task, we apply a multilayer perceptron (MLP)-convolutional neural network (CNN) model to identify whether an attribute is discriminative.  CNN digunakan untuk mengekstrak fitur tingkat rendah dari masukan. MLP mengambil peta CNN dan masukan rata untuk memprediksi label. Evaluasi F-skor sistem kita pada set tes adalah 0,629 (peringkat ke-15), yang menunjukkan bahwa sistem kita masih perlu diperbaiki. Namun, perilaku sistem kami dalam eksperimen kami memberikan informasi yang berguna, yang dapat membantu untuk meningkatkan pemahaman kolektif tugas novel ini.', 'de': 'Vorhandene semantische Modelle sind in der Lage, die semantische Ähnlichkeit von Wörtern zu identifizieren. Allerdings ist es für diese Modelle schwierig, zwischen einem Wort und einem anderen ähnlichen Wort zu unterscheiden. Ziel der SemEval-2018 Task 10 ist es daher, vorherzusagen, ob ein Wort ein diskriminierendes Attribut zwischen zwei Begriffen ist. In dieser Aufgabe wenden wir ein Multilayer Perceptron (MLP)-Convolutional Neuronal Network (CNN)-Modell an, um zu identifizieren, ob ein Attribut diskriminierend ist. Die CNNs werden verwendet, um Low-Level-Features aus den Eingängen zu extrahieren. Die MLP verwendet sowohl die abgeflachten CNN-Karten als auch Eingaben, um die Beschriftungen vorherzusagen. Die Bewertung F-Score unseres Systems auf dem Testset beträgt 0.629 (Rang 15th), was darauf hindeutet, dass unser System noch verbessert werden muss. Das Verhalten unseres Systems in unseren Experimenten liefert jedoch nützliche Informationen, die helfen können, das kollektive Verständnis dieser neuartigen Aufgabe zu verbessern.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای semantic وجود دارد قادر به شناسایی شبیه\u200cهای semantic از کلمات است. با این حال، برای این مدلها سخت است که بین یک کلمه و یک کلمه مشابه جدا شوند. بنابراین، هدف کار ۱۰ نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ این است که پیش بینی کنیم آیا یک کلمه یک ویژه جدایی بین دو فرضیه است. در این وظیفه، ما مدل شبکه عصبی (CNN) چندین طبقه (MLP) را برای شناسایی که آیا یک ویژه تفریح\u200cکننده است استفاده می\u200cکنیم. CNN برای خروج ویژگی سطح پایین از ورودها استفاده می\u200cشود. MLP هر دو نقشه\u200cهای پایین CNN را می\u200cگیرد و وارد می\u200cشود تا نقشه\u200cها را پیش\u200cبینی کند. ارزیابی سیستم ما در مجموعه آزمایش 0.629 (درجه 15م) است که نشان می دهد که سیستم ما هنوز باید بهتر شود. ولی رفتار سیستم ما در آزمایشات ما اطلاعات مفید را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که می\u200cتواند کمک کند تا درک جمعیت این کار رمانی را بهتر کند.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa sekunde unaoendelea una uwezo wa kutambua uliofanana na maneno. Hata hivyo, ni vigumu kwa mifano hii kutofautisha kati ya neno na neno jingine kama hilo. Kwa hiyo, lengo la SemEval-2018 Kazi 10 ni kutabiri kama neno ni mtazamo wa ubaguzi kati ya dhana mbili. Katika juhudi hili, tunatumia mtazamo wa mitandao ya kikatili ya neura (MLP) ili kutambua kama mtazamo wa kibaguzi. Shirika la CNNN linatumiwa kuondoa vipengele vya chini vya kiwango kutoka kwenye input. MLP inachukua ramani za CNN zisizo chache na input ili kutabiri alama. The evaluation F-score of our system on the test set is 0.629 (ranked 15th), which indicates that our system still needs to be improved.  Hata hivyo, tabia za mfumo wetu katika majaribio yetu zinatoa taarifa muhimu, ambazo zinaweza kusaidia kuboresha uelewa wa pamoja wa kazi hii ya riwaya.', 'sq': 'Modelet semantike ekzistuese janë në gjendje të identifikojnë ngjashmërinë semantike të fjalëve. Megjithatë, është e vështirë për këto modele të diskriminojnë midis një fjale dhe një fjale tjetër të ngjashme. Kështu, qëllimi i SemEval-2018 Task 10 është të parashikojë nëse një fjalë është një atributë diskriminuese midis dy koncepteve. Në këtë detyrë, ne aplikojmë një model të rrjetit nervor konvolutiv (CNN) për të identifikuar nëse një atributë është diskriminues. CNN-të përdoren për të nxjerrë karakteristika të nivelit të ulët nga hyrjet. MLP merr si hartat e CNN dhe hyrjet për të parashikuar etiketat. The evaluation F-score of our system on the test set is 0.629 (ranked 15th), which indicates that our system still needs to be improved.  Megjithatë, sjelljet e sistemit tonë në eksperimentet tona ofrojnë informacion të dobishëm, i cili mund të ndihmojë për të përmirësuar kuptimin kolektiv të kësaj detyre të re.', 'tr': 'Öň bar semantik nusgalar semantik sözlerin meňzeşligini tanap biler. Bu modeller bir s öz bilen benzeri söz arasynda ayrılmak kyn. Şol sebäpli, SemEval-2018 Görev 10-yň amasydyr bir söz iki düşünjä arasyndaky diskriminçä hasapladyr diýip çaklamak. Bu buýrukda, bir atribut diskriminçä dälmidigini tanamak üçin bir köp gatlak düşündirişi (MLP)-eňleşli näyral şebekege (CNN) nusgasyny tapylýarys. CNN girişinden aşak dereje özellikleri açmak üçin ullanylar. MLP çizgileri önlemek üçin her iki sag CNN haritalaryny alýar. Synagda sistemimiziň F-अ अंतर çykyşynyň 0,629 (dereje 15-nji dereje) düýbüldigini görkezýär. Bu sistemimiziň hala gelişmeli bolmalydygyny görkezýär. Ýöne biziň sistemamyzyň deneylerimizde bolan davranışlarymyz üçin faydaly informasiýa berer. Bu ýagdaýyň bu roman zadynyň jemgyýetiň düşünmesine kömek edip biler.', 'af': "Bestaande semantiese modele is in staat om die semantiese gelykheid van woorde te identifiseer. Maar dit is moeilik vir hierdie modele om tussen 'n woord en 'n ander gelyke woord te diskrimineer. So, die doel van SemEval-2018 Taak 10 is om te voorskou of 'n woord 'n diskriminasiewe eienskap tussen twee konsepte is. In hierdie taak, ons toewend 'n multilayer perceptron (MLP)-convolutional neuralnetwerk (CNN) model om te identifiseer of 'n eienskap diskriminasief is. Die CNN word gebruik om lae vlak funksies uit die invoer te pak. Die MLP neem beide die platte CNN kaarte en inputs om die etikette te voorskou. Die evaluering F- telling van ons stelsel op die toets stel is 0. 629 (rangeerde 15), wat wys dat ons stelsel nog moet verbeter word. Maar die gedrag van ons stelsel in ons eksperimente verskaf nuttige inligting, wat kan help om die kolektiewe verstanding van hierdie nuwe taak te verbeter.", 'am': 'የአሁኑ የsemantic ዓይነት የቃላትን ምሳሌ ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህን ምሳሌዎች ቃልን እና ሌላ ቃልን መለያየት በጣም ችግር ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም የሴmEval-2018 ስራ 10 ቃላት በሁለቱ አሳብ መካከል የተለያየ ጥያቄ መሆኑን ለማወቅ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የብዙልያይና የነዌብ መረብ (CNN) አካባቢ ነጥብ መሆኑን እናውቃለን፡፡ CNNs የደረጃ ምርጫዎችን ከinput ለማውጣት ይጠቀማል። የሜኑባር ምርጫዎች የድምፅ ደረጃችን የF-score ውጤት 0.629 (15ኛ ረጃፍ) ሲሆን ሲስተካከላችን ገና እንዲሻል የሚያስታውቀው ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በተፈተናችን የስርዓታችን ሁኔታ የሚጠቅመው መረጃዎችን ያሳድጋል፣ የዚህን የአሁኑን ስራ ማስተዋል ማሻል ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Existing semantik modellər semantik sözlərin bənzərini tanıma qadirlər. Lakin bu modellərə s öz və bənzər söz arasında ayrılmaq zordur. Beləliklə, SemEval-2018 Task 10 niyyəti, bir söz iki nəfsin arasında müxtəlif bir əlaqədir. Bu işdə, biz çoxlu-katlı görüntüləri (MLP)-konvolucional nöral a ğ (CNN) modelini təsdiqləyirik ki, bir təsəvvür müxtəlif olub olmadığını tanıma. SNN düşük səviyyədə xüsusiyyətlər içərisindən çıxartmaq üçün qullanılır. MLP hər ikisini də CNN haritalarını alır və etiketləri öndərmək üçün girər. Sistemimizin F-score müəyyən edilməsi 0,629 (dərəcəli 15-ci dərəcə), sistemimizin daha yaxşılaşması lazımdır. Ancaq sistemimizin təcrübələrimizdə istifadə edəcək məlumatları verir ki, bu yeni işin kolektiv anlayışını yaxşılaşdırmağa kömək edə bilər.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունի սեմանտիկ մոդելներ, որոնք հնարավոր են բառերի սեմանտիկ նմանությունը հասկանալ: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոդելների համար դժվար է տարբերակել մեկ բառի և մեկ այլ նման բառի միջև: Այսպիսով, ՍեմԷվալ 2018-ի 10-ի նպատակն է կանխատեսել, թե բառը երկու գաղափարի միջև տարբերակող առանձնահատկություն է: Այս խնդրի ընթացքում մենք կիրառում ենք բազմաշերտ ընկալման (MLP)-կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանցի (CNN) մոդել, որպեսզի պարզենք, թե արդյոք առանձնահատկությունը խտրականում է: CNN-ները օգտագործվում են ցածր մակարդակի հատկանիշների վերացման համար: MLP-ն օգտագործում է նաև CNN քարտեզներ և ներմուծներ, որպեսզի կանխատեսի պիտակները: Մեր համակարգի F-գնահատականը փորձարկման համակարգի վրա 0.629 է (15-րդ դասակարգը), ինչը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր համակարգը դեռ պետք է բարելավվի: Այնուամենայնիվ, մեր համակարգի վարքագիծը մեր փորձարկումների ընթացքում օգտակար տեղեկատվություն է տալիս, որը կարող է օգնել բարելավել այս նորարար խնդրի հավաքական հասկացությունը:', 'bn': 'বিদ্যমান সেমেন্টিক মডেল শব্দের সামান্যিক সমতুল্য সনাক্ত করতে সক্ষম। তবে এই মডেলগুলো একটি শব্দ এবং অন্যান্য একই শব্দের মধ্যে বৈষম্য করা কঠিন। তাই সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা হচ্ছে দুই ধারণার মধ্যে একটি শব্দ বৈষম্য কিনা। এই কাজে আমরা একটি মাল্টিলায়েয়ার প্রেক্ষাপট্রোন (এমএলপি)-সম্পূর্ণ নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) মডেল প্রয়োগ করি যাতে একটি বৈষম্য কিনা তা চ ইনপুট থেকে কম-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রকাশ করার জন্য সিএনএন ব্যবহার করা হয়। এমএলপি ফ্ল্যাটেট CNN মানচিত্র এবং ইনপুটের উভয় ট্র্যাগটি লেবেলের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে। পরীক্ষা সেটে আমাদের সিস্টেমের F-স্কোরের মূল্য হচ্ছে ০. 629 (১৫ রেঙ্ক) যার মানে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সিস্টেম এখনও উন তবে আমাদের পরীক্ষায় আমাদের সিস্টেমের আচরণ কার্যকর তথ্য প্রদান করে, যা এই নোভেল কাজের সম্মিলিত বুঝতে সাহায্য করবে।', 'bs': 'Postojeći semantički modeli su sposobni da identifikuju semantičku sličnost riječi. Međutim, za te modele je teško diskriminirati riječ i sličnu riječ. Stoga, cilj zadatka 10 od pola Evala-2018 je predvidjeti je li riječ diskriminacijski atribut između dva koncepta. U ovom zadatku primjenjujemo model multilayer perceptron (MLP)-konvolucionalne neuralne mreže (CNN) za identifikaciju da li je atribut diskriminiran. CNN se koristi za izvlačenje funkcija niskog nivoa iz ulaza. MLP uzima i ravne CNN mape i ulaze da predvidi etikete. Procjenjivanje F-rezultata našeg sistema na testnom setu je 0,629 (redovito 15), što ukazuje na to da naš sistem još uvijek mora biti poboljšan. Međutim, ponašanje našeg sistema u našim eksperimentima pružava korisne informacije, što može pomoći da poboljša kolektivno razumijevanje ovog novog zadatka.', 'ko': '기존의 의미 모델은 단어의 의미 유사성을 식별할 수 있다.그러나 이 모델들은 한 단어와 다른 비슷한 단어를 구별하기 어렵다.따라서 SemEval-18 퀘스트 10의 목적은 한 단어가 두 개념 간의 구별 속성인지 아닌지를 예측하는 것이다.이 임무에서는 속성이 구분되는지 여부를 식별하기 위해 MLP(Molume Interface) - 볼륨 신경 네트워크(CNN) 모델을 적용합니다.CNN은 입력에서 하위 레벨 피쳐를 추출하는 데 사용됩니다.MLP는 평탄한 CNN 지도와 입력을 이용해 라벨을 예측한다.테스트 세트의 평가 F 점수가 0.629(15위)인 우리 시스템은 아직도 개선이 필요하다는 것을 보여준다.그러나 우리의 시스템이 실험에서의 행위에 유용한 정보를 제공함으로써 이 새로운 임무에 대한 집단적인 이해를 향상시키는 데 도움이 된다.', 'ca': "Els models semàntics existents són capaços d'identificar la similitud semàntica de les paraules. No obstant això, és difícil que aquests models discriminin entre una paraula i una altra paraula similar. Thus, the aim of SemEval-2018 Task 10 is to predict whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two concepts.  En aquesta tasca, fem servir un model de rete neural convolucionada (CNN) multicapa per identificar si un atributés discriminatiu. Els CNN s'utilitzen per extrair característiques de baix nivell de les entrades. L'MLP agafa tant mapes plans de CNN com entrades per predir les etiquetes. La puntuació F del nostre sistema en el conjunt d'exàmens és de 0,629 (puntuació 15), que indica que el nostre sistema encara cal millorar. Però els comportaments del nostre sistema en els nostres experiments proporcionen informació útil, que pot ajudar a millorar la comprensió col·lectiva d'aquesta nova tasca.", 'cs': 'Existující sémantické modely jsou schopny identifikovat sémantickou podobnost slov. Pro tyto modely je však těžké rozlišovat mezi slovem a jiným podobným slovem. Cílem SemEval-2018 Task 10 je tedy předpovědět, zda je slovo diskriminačním atributem mezi dvěma pojmy. V této úloze používáme vícevrstvý perceptronový (MLP)-konvoluční model neuronové sítě (CNN), abychom identifikovali, zda je atribut diskriminační. CNN se používají k extrakci nízkých funkcí ze vstupů. MLP bere jak zploštěné CNN mapy, tak vstupy pro předpověď štítků. Hodnocení F-skóre našeho systému na testovací sadě je 0.629 (patnácté hodnocení), což naznačuje, že náš systém stále potřebuje zlepšit. Chování našeho systému v našich experimentech však poskytuje užitečné informace, které mohou pomoci zlepšit kolektivní porozumění tomuto novému úkolu.', 'et': 'Olemasolevad semantilised mudelid suudavad tuvastada sõnade semantilist sarnasust. Siiski on nende mudelite jaoks raske eristada sõna ja muu sarnase sõna. Seega on SemEval-2018 ülesande 10 eesmärk ennustada, kas sõna on kahe mõiste diskrimineeriv atribuut. Selles ülesandes rakendame mitmekihilist perceptroni (MLP)-konvolutsioonivõrgu (CNN) mudelit, et tuvastada, kas atribuut on diskrimineeriv. CNN-sid kasutatakse sisenditest madala taseme funktsioonide eraldamiseks. MLP võtab sildide prognoosimiseks nii lamedad CNN kaardid kui ka sisendid. Meie süsteemi hindamise F-skoor testikomplektis on 0,629 (15. koht), mis näitab, et meie süsteemi tuleb veel täiustada. Kuid meie süsteemi käitumine meie katsetes annab kasulikku teavet, mis võib aidata parandada kollektiivset arusaamist sellest uudsest ülesandest.', 'fi': 'Olemassa olevat semanttiset mallit pystyvät tunnistamaan sanojen semanttisen samankaltaisuuden. Näiden mallien on kuitenkin vaikea erottaa toisistaan sanaa ja toista vastaavaa sanaa. SemEval-2018 Task 10:n tavoitteena on siis ennustaa, onko sana kahden käsitteen välinen erottuva attribuutti. Tässä tehtävässä sovellamme monikerroksista havaintoverkkoa (MLP)-konvolutional neural network (CNN) -mallia selvittääksemme, onko attribuutti syrjivä. CNN:itä käytetään matalatasoisten ominaisuuksien erottamiseen tuloista. MLP käyttää sekä litteät CNN-kartat että syötteet etikettien ennustamiseen. Järjestelmämme F-pistemäärä testisarjassa on 0,629 (sijalla 15), mikä osoittaa, että järjestelmäämme on vielä parannettava. Järjestelmämme käyttäytyminen kokeissa antaa kuitenkin hyödyllistä tietoa, joka voi auttaa parantamaan kollektiivista ymmärrystä tästä uudesta tehtävästä.', 'jv': "Samsul semanti dadi punika dipunangé sampeyan semanti karo kelas kuwi. Nanging, iso nggambar kanggo model iki dadi pakan kelas kuwi lan kelas sing mungkin. Sampeyan, aksi seminval-2013 task 10 punika kanggo ngerasai kapan kelas kuwi sawar mung titik dhuwur. Nang task iki, kita aplikasi sistem multilayer For MLP teka ono sampeyan ginar sing ditambah gambar lan didol-gambar kanggo ngerasah etiket Where's the data set Nanging, jênêmêr, sawar-awak sistem sing nêmên ning énperusahaan anyar iki dadi informasi sing luwih ngéwangi, sing bisa nyebuté nggawe barang nggawe barang ngéwangi gerakan sing nggawe barang iki.", 'he': 'דוגמנים סמנטיים קיימים מסוגלים לזהות את הדומה הסמנטית של מילים. עם זאת, קשה לדוגמנים האלה להפריע בין מילה למילה דומה אחרת. ככה, מטרה של SemEval-2018 משימה 10 היא לחזות אם מילה היא תכונה דיסקרטיבית בין שני מושג. במשימה הזאת, אנו משתמשים בדוגמא של רשת עצבית מסובבת (MLP) במספר שכבות (CNN) כדי לזהות אם איכות היא דיסקרטיבית. CNN משתמשים כדי להוציא תכונות רמה נמוכה מהכניסות. MLP לוקח גם מפות CNN שטוחים וכניסים לחזות את התוויות. הערכה ב-F של המערכת שלנו על קבוצת הבדיקות היא 0.629 (רמה 15), מה שמצביע שהמערכת שלנו עדיין צריכה להשתפר. עם זאת, התנהגות של המערכת שלנו בניסויים שלנו מספקות מידע שימושי, שיכול לעזור לשפר את ההבנה הקולקטיבית של המשימה הרומנית הזו.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Kayya, ma'anar wannan misalin ya yi nauyi a tsakanin magana da wani kalma mai kama da shi. Daga haka, aimin aikin SemEl-2018 shine ya ƙayyade wata kalma ta zama mai yin gaɓa a tsakanin mawaƙo biyu. In this task, we apply a multilayer perceptron (MLP)-convolutional neural network (CNN) model to identify whether an attribute is discriminative.  An yi amfani da CNNS don a fitar da wasu tsari masu ƙasan-daraja daga shirin ayuka. KCharselect unicode block name Ana ƙaddara F-score na'asarmu a kan jarraba shine 0.639 (randan 15), da yana kasa cẽwa an ƙara ƙara tsarin mu. Kayya, aikin na'urarmu a cikin jarrabakinmu, yana da amfani masu amfani, wannan yana iya ƙara wa gyara fahimtar cikin aikin wannan yanzu.", 'sk': 'Obstoječi semantični modeli so sposobni identificirati semantično podobnost besed. Vendar pa je za te modele težko razlikovati med besedo in drugo podobno besedo. Tako je cilj naloge SemEval-2018 10 napovedati, ali je beseda diskriminativni atribut med dvema konceptoma. V tej nalogi uporabljamo večplastni model zaznavanja (MLP)-konvolucijskega nevronskega omrežja (CNN), da ugotovimo, ali je atribut diskriminativen. CNN-ji se uporabljajo za ekstrakcijo nizkih funkcij iz vhodov. MLP uporablja tako sploščene zemljevide CNN kot vhode za predvidevanje oznak. Ocena F-rezultata našega sistema na testnem naboru je 0,629 (uvrščena na 15. mesto), kar kaže, da je naš sistem treba še izboljšati. Vendar pa vedenje našega sistema v naših eksperimentih zagotavlja koristne informacije, ki lahko pomagajo izboljšati skupno razumevanje te nove naloge.', 'bo': 'གནས་ཡོད་པའི་སྔོན་ཅན་གྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དེ་ཚོར་བ་མཚུངས་ཀྱི་གསལ་ཚིག་དང་མཚུངས་འདུག ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་དབྱིབས་འདི་དག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་དང་མི་འདྲ་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་གཅིག་དང་དེ་མཚུངས་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་གཅིག་སྦྱར་རྩ དེར་བརྟེན། SemEval-2018 Task 10 གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་ཞིག་ནི་ལྟ་བ་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཁྱད་པར་ཞིག་ཡིན་མིན་ན་ བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཤེས་ཚོགས་སྣ་མང་ཙམ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ནང་འཇུག་ཐོག་ནས་ཚད་ཆུང་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཕྱིར་འདོན་བྱེད་པར་སྤྱོད་སྤྱོད་པ MLP འདིས་ཤོག་བྱང་རི་མེད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཚོན་རྟགས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་གྲངས་ཚད་ལྟར་ཚད་ལྟར་འཛིན་ན 0.629(མགོ་འཇོག་པ་དང་)རིམ་པ་དེ་བཞིན་ནམ་མ་ལག་གི་ཁ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད ཡིན་ནའང་། ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩོལ་ནུས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དེ་སྟོན་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་སྐྱོང'}
{'en': 'ALB at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : A System for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'fr': 'ALB au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 10\xa0: Un système de capture des attributs discriminants', 'ar': 'ALB في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: نظام لالتقاط السمات التمييزية', 'pt': 'ALB no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Um Sistema para Capturar Atributos Discriminativos', 'es': 'ALB en la Tarea 10 de SemEval-2018: Un sistema para capturar atributos discriminativos', 'ja': 'ALB at SemEval -2018 Task 10: A System for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'zh': 'ALB在SemEval-2018务10:获断属性之统', 'ru': 'ALB на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Система захвата дискриминационных атрибутов', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर ALB: भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए एक प्रणाली', 'ga': 'ALB ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Córas chun Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil', 'ka': 'ALB semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 10: დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების დაკავშირების სისტემა', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Ένα σύστημα καταγραφής διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών', 'hu': 'ALB a SemEval-2018-as feladat 10: A diszkriminat챠v attrib첬tumok r철gz챠t챕s챕re szolg찼l처 rendszer', 'it': 'ALB a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Un sistema per catturare gli attributi discriminatori', 'lt': 'ALB 2010 m. pusės vertinimo 10 užduotis: diskriminacinių požymių surinkimo sistema', 'kk': 'АлБ жарым- 2018 тапсырма 10: Дискриминалдық атрибуттарды түсіру жүйесі', 'ms': 'ALB pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Sistem untuk Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10: ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം കൈപ്പിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'ALB f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 10: Sistema għall-Qbid ta’ Attributi Diskriminattivi', 'mk': 'ALB на SemEval-2018 задача 10: Систем за фатување дискриминативни атрибути', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10:', 'pl': 'ALB na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: System rejestracji atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych', 'no': 'ALB ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 10: A System for Capturing Discriminate Attributes', 'sr': 'ALB na semiEval-2018 zadatku 10: Sistem za uhvatanje diskriminativnih atributa', 'ro': 'ALB la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Un sistem de capturare a atributelor discriminatorii', 'si': 'ALB at semeval-2018 Job 10: A System for Capturing Districtive Attibutes', 'so': 'ALB at SemEval-2018 Shaqada 10: A System for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 10: Discriminative பண்புகளை பிடிப்பதற்கு ஒரு அமைப்பு', 'sv': 'ALB på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Ett system för att fånga upp diskriminerande attribut', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس ۱۰ میں ALB: ایک سیسٹم دیسکریمیٹ اٹریبریٹ کاٹ کرنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'Eval- 2018 Vazifa 10: Discriminative Attributes', 'vi': 'ALB ở SemEvl-208 Task 10: A System for capturing discrimiontive Attraction', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Система за улавяне на дискриминационни атрибути', 'nl': 'ALB op SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Een systeem voor het vastleggen van discriminerende attributen', 'hr': 'ALB na zadatku 10: Sistem za uhićenje diskriminativnih atributa', 'da': 'ALB på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Et system til at fange diskriminatoriske attributter', 'de': 'ALB auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Ein System zur Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute', 'id': 'ALB di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Sistem untuk Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif', 'ko': 'ALB의 SemEval-18 작업 10: 감별 속성을 캡처하는 시스템', 'sw': 'ALB kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 10: Mfumo wa Kukamata Vitabu vya Ubaguzi', 'fa': 'ALB در ماموریت ۱۰: سیستم برای گرفتن ویژه\u200cهای جدایی', 'tr': 'ALB at SemEval-2018 Task 10: A System for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'af': "ALB by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 10: 'n Stelsel vir ontvanging van diskrimineerde eienskappe", 'hy': 'ԱլԲ-ը 2018-ի կիսագնդի 10. գործում. Դիսկրմինատիվ առանձնահատկությունների բռնելու համակարգ', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Diskriminatlı Attributları Yapılması Sistemi', 'bs': 'ALB na semiEval-2018 zadatku 10: Sistem za uhićenje diskriminativnih atributa', 'sq': 'ALB at SemEval-2018 Task 10: A System for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 10: A System for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'et': 'ALB SemEval-2018 ülesanne 10: diskrimineerivate atribuutide tabamise süsteem', 'fi': 'ALB SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Syrjimättömien attribuuttien talteenottojärjestelmä', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১০: বৈষম্যিক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর ক্যাপ্টেশনের একটি সিস্টেম', 'ca': "ALB a SemEval-2018 tasca 10: Un sistema de captura d'atributs discriminatoris", 'cs': 'ALB na SemEval-2018 Úkol 10: Systém pro zachycení diskriminačních atributů', 'sk': 'ALB na SemEval-2018 naloga 10: Sistem za zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov', 'ha': 'QSystemSemaphore', 'jv': 'AlB at seminval-2008 task 10: A System for Capture Diskrim nated Attribute', 'he': 'ALB ב SemEval-2018 משימה 10: מערכת לתפוס תוויות דיסקרמינציות', 'bo': 'ALB ལ SemEval-2018 Task 10:A System for Capturing Discriminative Attributes'}
{'en': 'Semantic difference detection attempts to capture whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two other words. For example, the discriminative feature red characterizes the first word from the (apple, banana) pair, but not the second. Modeling semantic difference is essential for language understanding systems, as it provides useful information for identifying particular aspects of word senses. This paper describes our system implementation (the ALB system of the NLP@Unibuc team) for the 10th task of the SemEval 2018 workshop, Capturing Discriminative Attributes. We propose a method for semantic difference detection that uses an SVM classifier with features based on co-occurrence counts and shallow semantic parsing, achieving 0.63 F1 score in the competition.', 'ar': 'يحاول اكتشاف الاختلاف الدلالي التقاط ما إذا كانت الكلمة سمة تمييزية بين كلمتين أخريين. على سبيل المثال ، الميزة التمييزية باللون الأحمر تميز الكلمة الأولى من زوج (تفاحة ، موز) ، ولكن ليس الثانية. تعد نمذجة الاختلاف الدلالي أمرًا ضروريًا لأنظمة فهم اللغة ، لأنها توفر معلومات مفيدة لتحديد جوانب معينة من حواس الكلمات. تصف هذه الورقة تنفيذ نظامنا (نظام ALB لفريق NLP @ Unibuc) للمهمة العاشرة من ورشة عمل SemEval 2018 ، "التقاط السمات المميزة". نقترح طريقة لاكتشاف الفروق الدلالية التي تستخدم مصنف SVM مع ميزات تستند إلى عدد التكرار والتحليل الدلالي الضحل ، وتحقيق 0.63 درجة F1 في المنافسة.', 'fr': "La détection de différence sémantique tente de déterminer si un mot est un attribut discriminant entre deux autres mots. Par exemple, la caractéristique discriminante rouge caractérise le premier mot de la paire (pomme, banane), mais pas le second. La modélisation de la différence sémantique est essentielle pour les systèmes de compréhension du langage, car elle fournit des informations utiles pour identifier des aspects particuliers des sens des mots. Cet article décrit la mise en œuvre de notre système (le système ALB de l'équipe NLP @Unibuc) pour la 10e tâche de l'atelier SemEval 2018, «\xa0Capturing Discriminative Attributes\xa0». Nous proposons une méthode de détection des différences sémantiques qui utilise un classificateur SVM avec des caractéristiques basées sur le nombre de cooccurrences et l'analyse sémantique superficielle, atteignant un score F1 de 0,63 dans la compétition.", 'es': 'La detección de diferencias semánticas intenta detectar si una palabra es un atributo discriminatorio entre otras dos palabras. Por ejemplo, el rasgo discriminativo rojo caracteriza la primera palabra del par (manzana, plátano), pero no la segunda. Modelar la diferencia semántica es esencial para los sistemas de comprensión del lenguaje, ya que proporciona información útil para identificar aspectos particulares de los sentidos de las palabras. Este documento describe la implementación de nuestro sistema (el sistema ALB del equipo de NLP @Unibuc) para la décima tarea del taller SemEval 2018, «Capturar atributos discriminativos». Proponemos un método para la detección de diferencias semánticas que utiliza un clasificador SVM con características basadas en recuentos de coocurrencia y análisis semántico superficial, logrando una puntuación F1 de 0.63 en la competencia.', 'pt': 'A detecção de diferença semântica tenta capturar se uma palavra é um atributo discriminativo entre duas outras palavras. Por exemplo, o traço discriminativo vermelho caracteriza a primeira palavra do par (maçã, banana), mas não a segunda. A modelagem da diferença semântica é essencial para sistemas de compreensão da linguagem, pois fornece informações úteis para identificar aspectos particulares dos sentidos das palavras. Este artigo descreve a implementação do nosso sistema (sistema ALB da equipe NLP@Unibuc) para a 10ª tarefa do workshop SemEval 2018, “Capturando Atributos Discriminativos”. Propomos um método para detecção de diferenças semânticas que utiliza um classificador SVM com recursos baseados em contagens de coocorrências e análise semântica superficial, alcançando 0,63 pontuação F1 na competição.', 'ja': '意味的差異検出は、単語が他の2つの単語間の識別属性であるかどうかをキャプチャしようとします。たとえば、赤い識別特徴は、最初の単語を（リンゴ、バナナ）ペアから特徴づけるが、2番目の単語は特徴づけない。語感の特定の側面を識別するために有用な情報を提供するため、意味の違いをモデリングすることは、言語理解システムにとって不可欠である。本稿では、SemEval 2018ワークショップの10番目のタスクである「差別的属性の取得」のためのシステム実装（ NLP @ UnibucチームのALBシステム）について説明します。共起カウントと浅いセマンティック構文解析に基づく特徴を持つSVM分類子を用いたセマンティック差分検出方法を提案し、競合で0.63 F 1スコアを達成した。', 'zh': '语义差異检试获一单词非二单词之间也。 如判别特徵红色示(苹果,蕉)对中首单词,然非二单词也。 语义异建模于言解统至重,以其为识词义之特定有用也。 本文引我为SemEval 2018研讨会第10"获判属性"之统(NLP@Unibuc团队ALB系统)。 臣等条上语义差检测之法,宜用共现数、浅层语义解析特征SVM分类器,于比赛中至0.63 F1分数。', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ अंतर का पता लगाने के लिए यह कैप्चर करने का प्रयास करता है कि क्या कोई शब्द दो अन्य शब्दों के बीच एक भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषता है। उदाहरण के लिए, भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषता लाल (सेब, केला) जोड़ी से पहले शब्द की विशेषता है, लेकिन दूसरा नहीं। भाषा समझने की प्रणालियों के लिए शब्दार्थ अंतर मॉडलिंग आवश्यक है, क्योंकि यह शब्द इंद्रियों के विशेष पहलुओं की पहचान करने के लिए उपयोगी जानकारी प्रदान करता है। यह पेपर SemEval 2018 कार्यशाला के 10 वें कार्य के लिए हमारे सिस्टम कार्यान्वयन (NLP@Unibuc टीम की एएलबी प्रणाली) का वर्णन करता है, "भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करना"। हम शब्दार्थ अंतर का पता लगाने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो सह-घटना की गिनती और उथले शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग के आधार पर सुविधाओं के साथ एक एसवीएम क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करता है, प्रतियोगिता में 0.63 एफ 1 स्कोर प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Обнаружение семантической разницы пытается зафиксировать, является ли слово дискриминирующим атрибутом между двумя другими словами. Например, дискриминирующий признак красный характеризует первое слово из пары (яблоко, банан), но не второе. Моделирование семантической разницы имеет важное значение для систем понимания языка, поскольку оно предоставляет полезную информацию для идентификации конкретных аспектов смысла слова. В данной статье описывается внедрение нашей системы (система ALB команды NLP@ Unibuc) для 10-й задачи семинара SemEval 2018 «Захват дискриминационных признаков». Предложен метод определения семантических различий, который использует классификатор виртуальных машин защиты с признаками, основанными на подсчете совпадений и неглубоком семантическом разборе, достигая в конкурсе 0.63 балла F1.', 'ga': 'Déanann braite difríochta shéimeantach iarracht a fháil amach an tréith idirdhealaitheach idir dhá fhocal eile é focal. Mar shampla, tréithríonn an ghné idirdhealaitheach dearg an chéad fhocal ón bpéire (úll, banana), ach ní an dara ceann. Tá sé ríthábhachtach éagsúlacht shéimeantach a shamhaltú do chórais tuisceana teanga, mar go soláthraíonn sé faisnéis úsáideach chun gnéithe ar leith de chiall na bhfocal a aithint. Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcur i bhfeidhm córais (córas ALB na foirne NLP@Unibuc) don 10ú tasc de cheardlann SemEval 2018, “Capturing Discriminative Attributes”. Molaimid modh chun difríochta shéimeantach a bhrath a úsáideann aicmitheoir SVM le gnéithe bunaithe ar chomhaireamh comh-tharla agus parsáil shéimeantach éadomhain, ag baint amach 0.63 scór F1 sa chomórtas.', 'ka': 'სემონტიკური განსხვავების განსხვავება მოცდილობს დააკვიროთ თუ სიტყვა დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტი არის სხვა ორი სიტყვას შორის. მაგალითად, დესკრიმინატიური ფუნქცია შავი პირველი სიტყვას (ახლა, ბანანია) ორიდან, მაგრამ არა ორიდან. სიმენტიკური განსხვავება მნიშვნელოვანია სიტყვების განსხვავება სიტყვების სისტემისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვის, რადგან ის უკეთესი ინფორმაცია იგი ეს დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემის გამოყენება (ALB სისტემი) NLP@Unibuc (ჯგუფი) სამუშაო semiEval 2018 სამუშაო სამუშაო ატრიბუტებისთვის 10-ი სამუშაო. ჩვენ გვეძლევთ სემონტიკური განსხვავების მეტი, რომელიც გამოყენება SVM კლასიფიკაციერი, რომელიც განსხვავებული განსხვავებების ფუნქციებით, რომელიც განსხვავებული მოვლენების მნიშვნელობაზე და ცოტა სემონტი', 'hu': 'A szemantikus különbségérzékelés megpróbálja megállapítani, hogy egy szó két másik szó között diszkriminatív attribútum. Például a piros diszkriminatív tulajdonság jellemzi az első szót az (alma, banán) párból, de a második nem. A szemantikai különbségek modellezése alapvető fontosságú a nyelvértési rendszerek számára, mivel hasznos információkat nyújt a szóérzékek egyes aspektusainak azonosításához. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a rendszer megvalósítását (a NLP@Unibuc A SemEval 2018 workshopjának 10. feladatára, a diszkriminatív attribútumok rögzítése címmel. Javasoljuk a szemantikai különbség felismerésére szolgáló módszert, amely egy SVM osztályozót használ, amely egyidejűleg előfordulási számokon és sekély szemantikai elemzésen alapul, ezzel 0,63 F1 pontszámot ér el a versenyben.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση σημασματικής διαφοράς επιχειρεί να συλλάβει αν μια λέξη είναι διακριτικό χαρακτηριστικό μεταξύ δύο άλλων λέξεων. Για παράδειγμα, το διακριτικό χαρακτηριστικό κόκκινο χαρακτηρίζει την πρώτη λέξη από το ζευγάρι (μήλο, μπανάνα), αλλά όχι τη δεύτερη. Η μοντελοποίηση σημασιολογικής διαφοράς είναι απαραίτητη για τα συστήματα κατανόησης γλωσσών, καθώς παρέχει χρήσιμες πληροφορίες για τον προσδιορισμό συγκεκριμένων πτυχών των αισθήσεων λέξεων. Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την εφαρμογή του συστήματός μας (το σύστημα ALB της NLP@Unibuc Ομάδα) για το δέκατο έργο του εργαστηρίου "Καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών". Προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο για την ανίχνευση σημασιολογικών διαφορών που χρησιμοποιεί έναν ταξινομητή με χαρακτηριστικά που βασίζονται σε αριθμούς συνεμφάνισης και ρηχή σημασιολογική ανάλυση, επιτυγχάνοντας βαθμολογία 0.63 στον διαγωνισμό.', 'lt': 'Semantinių skirtumų nustatymas bando nustatyti, ar žodis yra diskriminacinis požymis tarp kitų dviejų žodžių. For example, the discriminative feature red characterizes the first word from the (apple, banana) pair, but not the second.  Semantinių skirtumų modeliavimas yra labai svarbus kalbos supratimo sistemoms, nes jame pateikiama naudinga informacija tam tikriems žodžio jutimų aspektams nustatyti. Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų sistemos įgyvendinimas (ALB sistema NLP@Unibuc (komanda) 2010 m. SemEval seminaro „Diskriminacinių požymių gavimas“ dešimtoji užduotis. Siūlome semantinio skirtumo nustatymo metodą, kuris naudoja SVM klasifikatorių su savybėmis, grindžiamomis bendrais atvejų skaičiais ir žemu semantiniu analizavimu, siekdamas 0,63 F1 rezultato konkurse.', 'it': "Il rilevamento della differenza semantica tenta di rilevare se una parola è un attributo discriminatorio tra altre due parole. Ad esempio, la caratteristica discriminante rosso caratterizza la prima parola della coppia (mela, banana), ma non la seconda. Modellare la differenza semantica è essenziale per i sistemi di comprensione del linguaggio, in quanto fornisce informazioni utili per identificare aspetti particolari dei sensi delle parole. Questo articolo descrive la nostra implementazione del sistema (il sistema ALB del NLP@Unibuc Team) per il 10° compito del workshop SemEval 2018, 'Catturare gli attributi discriminatori'. Proponiamo un metodo per il rilevamento semantico delle differenze che utilizza un classificatore SVM con caratteristiche basate su conteggi di co-occorrenza e analisi semantica superficiale, ottenendo un punteggio F1 0,63 nella competizione.", 'kk': 'Екі сөз арасында дискриминациялық атрибутты анықтау әрекеті. Мысалы, қызыл дискриминациялық функциясы бірінші сөзді (апплет, банана) екіншіден таңдайды, бірақ екіншіден емес. Семантикалық айырмашылығы үлгілеу тілдерді түсіну жүйелері үшін маңызды, себебі ол сөздердің сезімдерін анықтау үшін пайдалы мәлімет береді. Бұл қағаз жүйеңіздің істеу жүйесін (ALB жүйесі)анықтайды NLP@Unibuc "Дискриминалды аттрибуттарды түсіру" деген 2018 semiEval жұмысының 10- ші тапсырмасы. Біз SVM классификаторын біріктіру сандарына негізделген, біріктіру сандарына негізделген және біріктірілген семантикалық талдау әдісін табу арқылы ұсынамыз. Сондағы 0,63 F1 нүктесі жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Семантичка детекција на разлики се обидува да сфати дали зборот е дискриминативен атрибут помеѓу два други збора. На пример, дискриминативната карактеристика црвена го карактеризира првиот збор од парот (јаболко, банана), но не вториот. Моделирањето на семантичната разлика е суштинско за системите за разбирање на јазикот, бидејќи обезбедува корисни информации за идентификување на специфичните аспекти на зборовите чувства. Овој документ го опишува нашето спроведување на системот (ALB системот на NLP@Unibuc Тим) за десеттата задача на работилницата SemEval 2018, „Фаќање дискриминативни атрибути“. Предложуваме метод за детекција на семантични разлики кој користи класификатор на СВМ со карактеристики базирани на бројките на коопрециденции и ниско семантично анализирање, достигнувајќи 0,63 поени Ф1 во натпреварот.', 'ml': "ഒരു വാക്ക് രണ്ടു വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസം എന്ന് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. ഉദാഹരണത്തിന് ഉദാഹരണമാകുന്നു, ചുവന്ന വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ വാക്കിനെ (ആപ്പിള്\u200d, banana) രണ്ടാമത്തേയല്ല, രണ്ടാമത്തേയല്ല. മോഡോളിങ് സെമാന്റിക് വ്യത്യാസം ഭാഷ ബുദ്ധിയുള്ള സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രത്യേക വി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു NLP@Unibuc സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 വര്\u200dക്ക് ഷോര്\u200dച്ചര്\u200dപ്പിലെ പത്താം ജോലി, 'ഡിസ്ക്യൂമിക് വ്യവസ്ഥകളെ പിടികൂടുന്നു സെമാന്റിക് വ്യത്യാസം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത്. അത് ഒരു SVM ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. സഹസംഭവം എണ്ണം അടിസ്ഥ", 'ms': "Pengesanan perbezaan Semantic cuba untuk menangkap sama ada perkataan adalah atribut diskriminatif diantara dua perkataan lain. Contohnya, ciri-ciri merah yang diskriminatif mengungkapkan perkataan pertama dari pasangan (apel, pisang), tetapi bukan yang kedua. Memodel perbezaan semantik adalah penting untuk sistem pemahaman bahasa, kerana ia menyediakan maklumat berguna untuk mengenalpasti aspek tertentu bagi sens perkataan. Kertas ini menggambarkan pelaksanaan sistem kami (sistem ALB bagi NLP@Unibuc  team) for the 10th task of the SemEval 2018 workshop, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes'.  We propose a method for semantic difference detection that uses an SVM classifier with features based on co-occurrence counts and shallow semantic parsing, achieving 0.63 F1 score in the competition.", 'mt': "L-iskoperta tad-differenzi Semantiċi tipprova taqbad jekk kelma hijiex attribut diskriminatorju bejn żewġ kliem oħra. Pereżempju, il-karatteristika diskriminatorja ħamra tikkaratterizza l-ewwel kelma mill-par (tuffieħ, banana), iżda mhux it-tieni. L-immudellar tad-differenza semantika huwa essenzjali għas-sistemi ta’ fehim tal-lingwa, peress li jipprovdi informazzjoni utli għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ aspetti partikolari tas-sensi tal-kliem. Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-implimentazzjoni tas-sistema tagħna (is-sistema ALB tal- NLP@Unibuc (tim) għall-għaxar kompitu tal-workshop SemEval 2018, 'Qbid ta' Attributi Diskriminattivi'. Aħna nipproponu metodu għall-identifikazzjoni tad-differenzi semantiċi li juża klassifikatur SVM b’karatteristiċi bbażati fuq l-għadd ta’ kookkorrenzi u l-analiżi semantika baxxa, li jikseb punteġġ ta’ 0.63 F1 fil-kompetizzjoni.", 'mn': "Өөр үг хоёр үг хоорондын ялгаатай харьцуулалт эсэхийг ойлгох гэж оролдож байна. Жишээлбэл, улаан ялгаатай хувь нь (алим, банана) хоёрын анхны үгийг харуулдаг, гэхдээ хоёр дахь үгийг биш. Земантийн ялгааг загварчлах нь хэл ойлгох системийн тулд чухал юм. Яагаад гэвэл энэ нь үгийн мэдрэмжүүдийн тодорхой асуудлыг тодорхойлох хэрэгтэй мэдээлэл өгдөг. Энэ цаас бидний системийн үйл ажиллагааг тайлбарладаг. NLP@Unibuc (баг) 2018 оны SemEval-ын 10-р ажиллагааны ажиллагаанд, 'Discriminate Attributes' гэх мэт. Бид салбарын ялгааг олох арга зааж өгдөг. Ингээд хамтран үйл явдлын тоо, бага зэрэг семантик хуваалцах, өрсөлдөөнд 0.63 F1 оноо хүртэл SVM хуваалцагчийг ашигладаг.", 'ro': 'Detectarea diferențelor semantice încearcă să surprindă dacă un cuvânt este un atribut discriminatoriu între alte două cuvinte. De exemplu, caracteristica discriminatorie roșie caracterizează primul cuvânt din perechea (măr, banană), dar nu și al doilea. Modelarea diferențelor semantice este esențială pentru sistemele de înțelegere a limbilor, deoarece oferă informații utile pentru identificarea anumitor aspecte ale simțurilor cuvintelor. Această lucrare descrie implementarea sistemului nostru (sistemul ALB al NLP@Unibuc Echipa) pentru cea de-a 10-a sarcină a atelierului SemEval 2018, "Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii". Propunem o metodă de detectare a diferențelor semantice care utilizează un clasificator SVM cu caracteristici bazate pe numărul de coerențe și analizarea semantică superficială, obținând 0,63 punctaj F1 în competiție.', 'no': 'Semantisk forskjellingsoppdaging prøver å henta om eit ord er ein diskriminasjon attributt mellom to andre ord. For eksempel, den diskriminasjonen raude karakteriserer den første ordet frå paren (apple, banana), men ikkje den andre. Modelering av semantisk forskjell er viktig for språksforstålsystemet, sidan det gjev nyttig informasjon for å identifisera spesielle aspektar av ordsensar. Denne papiret beskriver systemimplementasjonen våre (ALB-systemet av den NLP@Unibuc « team » for den 10. oppgåva av semiEval 2018 arbeidsområdet « Capturing Discriminate Attributes ». Vi foreslår ein metode for oppdaging av semantiske forskjeller som brukar ein SVM-klassifisering med funksjonar basert på samtidige taler og sållog semantisk tolking, og når det gjer 0,63 F1-poeng i konkurransen.', 'so': "Baaritaanka kala duwanaanshaha galmada ayaa isku dayaya in ereygu uu yahay takoor labada hadal oo kale. Tusaale ahaan takoorista takoorka waxaa ku qoran labada labo ee ugu horreeya (apple, banaan) ee labaad, laakiin ma aha labaad. Isku-bedelka semantiga waxaa muhiim u ah nidaamka waxgarashada luuqada, sababtoo ah waxay macluumaad faa’iido leh oo ku qoran qaabka aqoonsashada guud ee hadalka. Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran habaarka nidaamka (nidaamka ALB) NLP@Unibuc Team) shaqada 10aad ee shabakadda SemEval 2018, 'Qabsasha takoorista takooris'. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ku saabsan bedelka semantika, kaasoo isticmaalaya fasax SVM oo ku saabsan tirada isbedelka iyo baaritaanka semantika oo dhamaadka 0.63 F1.", 'pl': 'Wykrywanie różnic semantycznej próbuje uchwycić, czy słowo jest atrybutem dyskryminacyjnym pomiędzy dwoma innymi słowami. Na przykład cecha dyskryminacyjna czerwona charakteryzuje pierwsze słowo z pary (jabłko, banan), ale nie drugie. Modelowanie różnicy semantycznej jest niezbędne dla systemów rozumienia języka, ponieważ dostarcza przydatnych informacji do identyfikacji poszczególnych aspektów zmysłów słowa. Niniejszy artykuł opisuje naszą implementację systemu (system ALB NLP@Unibuc zespół) na dziesiąte zadanie warsztatów SemEval 2018 pt. "Wychwytywanie atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych". Proponujemy metodę wykrywania różnic semantycznych, która wykorzystuje klasyfikator SVM z funkcjami opartymi na liczbach współwystępowania i płytkim parsowaniu semantycznym, osiągając wynik 0.63 F1 w konkursie.', 'sv': 'Semantisk skillnad detektering försöker fånga om ett ord är ett diskriminerande attribut mellan två andra ord. Till exempel kännetecknar den diskriminerande funktionen rött det första ordet från paret (äpple, banan), men inte det andra. Modellering av semantiska skillnader är avgörande för språkförståelsesystem, eftersom det ger användbar information för att identifiera vissa aspekter av ordsinnen. Denna uppsats beskriver vår systemimplementering (ALB-systemet för NLP@Unibuc (team) för den tionde uppgiften i SemEval 2018 workshop, "Att fånga diskriminerande attribut". Vi föreslår en metod för semantisk differensdetektering som använder en SVM-klassificerare med funktioner baserade på samtidig förekomst och ytlig semantisk tolkning, vilket uppnår 0,63 F1 poäng i tävlingen.', 'sr': 'Semantički otkrivanje razlika pokušava da uhvati da li je riječ diskriminacija između dve druge reči. Na primer, diskriminacija crvena karakterizira prvu reč od parova (jabuka, banana), ali ne drugog. Modeliranje semantičke razlike je ključno za sisteme razumevanja jezika, jer pruža korisne informacije za identifikaciju posebnih aspekta čula riječi. Ovaj papir opisuje naše implementacije sistema (ALB sistem NLP@Unibuc Tim) za deseti zadatak semiEvala 2018. radionice "Uhvatanje diskriminativnih atributa". Predlažemo metodu za otkrivanje semantičkih razlika koja koristi klasifikatora SVM sa karakteristikama na temelju broja istodogađaja i plitkih semantičkih analiza, ostvarivši 0,63 F1 rezultata na konkurenciji.', 'ta': "இரண்டு வார்த்தைகளுக்கிடையில் ஒரு வார்த்தை வேறு வித்தியாசமான குணங்களை பிடிக்க முயற்சிக்கிறதா. எடுத்துக்காட்டுக்காட்டாக, வித்தியாசமான குணங்கள் சிகப்பு எழுத்துருவின் முதல் வார்த்தையை குறிக்கிறது (ஆப் மாதிரி பாதிரி வேறுபாடு இந்த தாள் எங்கள் அமைப்பு செயல்பாட்டை விளக்குகிறது (எல்பி முறைமையின் NLP@Unibuc செம்வால் 2018 பணிக்கான 10வது குழு 'Discriminative Attributes பிடித்தல்'. நாம் பெம்பென்டிக் வேறுபாடு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான முறைமையை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது ஒரு SVM வகைப்பாளரை பயன்படுத்துகிறது அது சேர்ந்து நிகழ்வு எண்ணி", 'ur': 'سیمنٹی تفاوت پھیرنے کی کوشش کرتی ہے کہ ایک کلام دوسرے کلمات کے درمیان تفاوت کا ایک اختلاف ہے مثال، تقسیم کرنے والی فرصت سرخ کی پہلی کلمہ (سفاح، موٹی، موٹی) جوڑے سے ہے، لیکن دوسری نہیں ہے۔ سیمنٹی تفاوت مدل کرنا زبان سمجھنے کی سیستموں کے لئے ضروری ہے، کیونکہ یہ کلمات سنس کے مخصوص حصوں کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے مفید معلومات دیتا ہے. یہ کاغذ ہماری سیسٹم کی عملومات کی توصیح کرتا ہے NLP@Unibuc (تیم) SemEval 2018 کارشاپ کے 10م کام کے لئے، "دیسکریمیٹی اٹریتوں کو کاٹ کر رہا ہے". ہم سیمنٹی فرق شناسایت کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیشنهاد کریں گے جو ایک SVM کلاسیر کو استعمال کرتا ہے جو ایک سامنٹی گنتی اور کم سیمنٹی پارسینگ پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے، مقابلہ میں 0.63 F1 اسکور پہنچ جاتا ہے۔', 'si': 'සෙමාන්ටික වෙනස් හොයාගන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා වචනයක් අනිත් වචනයක් අතර දෙකක් අතර විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේ උදාහරණයෙන්, විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් රාතු වර්ගයක් පළමු වර්ගය (ඇපල්, බැනානා) දෙන්නෙක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා සෙමාන්ටික වෙනස් මොඩල් කරනවා භාෂාව තේරුම් පද්ධතිය සඳහා අවශ්\u200dයයි, මොකද ඒක වචන සැකසුම් විශේෂ සැකස මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධති ප්\u200dරමාණය (ALB පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතිය) NLP@Unibuc (කණ්ඩායම) සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩසටහනේ 10වෙනි වැඩසටහන් වෙනුවෙන්, විශේෂ විශේෂ අයිතිකාරීන් අයිතික අපි සෙමැන්ටික් වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා, සම්බන්ධ වෙනස් ගණන් ස', 'uz': "Name Masalan, ajoyib moslamalar sariq so'zlarning birinchi so'zni (apple, banana) ikkinchi so'zdan iborat, lekin ikkinchi marta emas. Name Bu qogʻoz bizning tizimimizni bajarishimizni anglatadi (tizimning ALB tizimi) NLP@Unibuc  team) for the 10th task of the SemEval 2018 workshop, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes'.  Biz o'zgarishga 0.63 F1 qiymatga erishish uchun SVM klassiflarini ishlatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện sự khác biệt kỳ diệu nhằm xác định xem một từ có phải là một mê hiệu phân biệt giữa hai từ khác không. Ví dụ, tính năng phân biệt màu đỏ đặc trưng cho từ đầu tiên trong hai chữ "táo, chuối", nhưng không phải từ thứ hai. Chế độ phân biệt ngữ pháp rất quan trọng với hệ thống hiểu biết ngôn ngữ, vì nó cung cấp thông tin hữu ích để xác định các khía cạnh đặc biệt của các giác quan từ. Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống của chúng ta (ALB) NLP@Unibuc Nhóm) cho nhiệm vụ thứ mười năm của hội thảo SemEvl 208,\'Bắt trả phụ thuộc lực phân". Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp tìm ra điểm khác biệt theo ngữ nghĩa dùng một phân loại SVM với các tính năng dựa trên điểm đồng xảy ra và phân tích nhỏ theo ngữ pháp, đạt được vị trí 0.63 F1 trong cuộc thi.', 'bg': 'Семантичното откриване на различия се опитва да улови дали дадена дума е дискриминационен атрибут между две други думи. Например, дискриминационната черта червена характеризира първата дума от двойката (ябълка, банан), но не и втората. Моделирането на семантичната разлика е от съществено значение за системите за разбиране на езика, тъй като предоставя полезна информация за идентифициране на конкретни аспекти на словните сетива. Настоящата статия описва внедряването на нашата система (системата АЛБ на NLP@Unibuc Екип) за десетата задача на семинара "Заснемане на дискриминационни атрибути". Предлагаме метод за откриване на семантични различия, който използва класификатор с функции, базирани на броя на съпътстващите събития и плитко семантично анализиране, постигайки 0,63 оценка във Формула 1 в състезанието.', 'hr': "Semantički otkrivanje razlika pokušava uhvatiti da li je riječ diskriminacijski atribut između drugih dvije riječi. Na primjer, diskriminacija crvena karakterizira prvu riječ od pare (jabuka, banana), ali ne druge. Modeliranje semantičke razlike je ključno za sustave razumijevanja jezika, jer pruža korisne informacije za identifikaciju posebnih aspekta čula riječi. Ovaj papir opisuje provedbu našeg sustava (ALB sustav NLP@Unibuc Tim) za deseti zadatak radionice semiEvala 2018, 'Uhvaćanje diskriminacijskih atributa'. Predlažemo metodu za otkrivanje semantičkih razlika koja koristi klasifikatora SVM-a s karakteristikama na temelju broja istodogađaja i plitke semantičke analize, ostvarivši 0,63 F1 rezultate na natjecanju.", 'nl': "Semantische verschildetectie probeert vast te leggen of een woord een onderscheidend kenmerk is tussen twee andere woorden. Het onderscheidende kenmerk rood kenmerkt bijvoorbeeld het eerste woord van het (appel, banaan) paar, maar niet het tweede. Het modelleren van semantisch verschil is essentieel voor taalbegripssystemen, omdat het nuttige informatie biedt voor het identificeren van bepaalde aspecten van woordzintuigen. Deze paper beschrijft onze systeemimplementatie (het ALB-systeem van de NLP@Unibuc Team) voor de 10e taak van de SemEval 2018 workshop, 'Het vastleggen van discriminatieve attributen'. We stellen een methode voor semantische verschillen detectie voor die gebruikmaakt van een SVM classificator met functies gebaseerd op co-incident tells en ondiepe semantische parsing, waardoor 0.63 F1 score in de competitie wordt bereikt.", 'da': "Semantisk forskelsregistrering forsøger at fange, om et ord er en diskriminerende attribut mellem to andre ord. For eksempel kendetegner den diskriminerende funktion rød det første ord fra (æble, banan) parret, men ikke det andet. Modellering af semantisk forskel er afgørende for sprogforståelsessystemer, da det giver nyttige oplysninger til at identificere bestemte aspekter af ordsanser. Dette dokument beskriver vores systemimplementering (ALB-systemet i NLP@Unibuc (team) til den 10. opgave af SemEval 2018 workshop, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes'. Vi foreslår en metode til semantisk forskel detektering, der bruger en SVM klassificering med funktioner baseret på co-forekomst counts og overfladisk semantisk parsing, der opnår 0,63 F1 score i konkurrencen.", 'id': "Semantic difference detection attempts to capture whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two other words.  Contohnya, karakteristik merah diskriminatif karakteristik kata pertama dari pasangan (apel, pisang), tetapi bukan yang kedua. Modeling perbedaan semantis adalah penting untuk sistem pemahaman bahasa, karena menyediakan informasi berguna untuk mengidentifikasi aspek tertentu dari sens kata. This paper describes our system implementation (the ALB system of the  NLP@Unibuc Tim) untuk tugas ke-10 dari workshop SemEval 2018, 'Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif'. Kami mengusulkan metode untuk deteksi perbedaan semantis yang menggunakan klasifikasi SVM dengan ciri-ciri berdasarkan jumlah korespondensi dan analisis semantis rendah, mencapai skor 0,63 F1 dalam kompetisi.", 'fa': 'پیدا کردن تفاوت\u200cهای متفاوتی سعی می\u200cکند بگیرد آیا یک کلمه یک ویژه جدایی بین دو کلمه دیگر است. برای مثال، ویژه جدایی قرمز اولین کلمه از جفت (سیب، موز) را تعریف می\u200cکند، ولی نه دوم. مدل تفاوت semantic برای سیستم\u200cهای درک زبان ضروری است، زیرا این اطلاعات مفید برای شناسایی کردن نقطه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از حس\u200cهای کلمه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. این کاغذ عملکرد سیستم ما را توصیف می\u200cکند (سیستم ALB NLP@Unibuc (تیم) برای دستمین کار کارشناسی semiEval 2018، دستگیر کردن ویژه\u200cهای جدایی. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم روش برای کشف تفاوت\u200cهای semantic که از یک کلینگر SVM استفاده می\u200cکند با ویژه\u200cهایی که بر اساس شماره\u200cهای همزمان اتفاق می\u200cافتد و بازرسی\u200cهای semantic کوچک می\u200cشود، به رسیدن امتیاز 0.63 F1 در رقابت می\u200cرسد.', 'de': "Semantische Differenzerkennung versucht zu erfassen, ob ein Wort ein diskriminierendes Attribut zwischen zwei anderen Wörtern ist. Zum Beispiel kennzeichnet das Unterscheidungsmerkmal Rot das erste Wort aus dem Paar (Apfel, Banane), aber nicht das zweite. Die Modellierung semantischer Unterschiede ist für Sprachverständnissysteme unerlässlich, da sie nützliche Informationen zur Identifizierung bestimmter Aspekte von Wortsinnen liefert. Diese Arbeit beschreibt unsere Systemimplementierung (das ALB-System der NLP@Unibuc Team) für die zehnte Aufgabe des SemEval 2018 Workshops 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes'. Wir schlagen eine Methode zur semantischen Differenzerkennung vor, die einen SVM-Klassifikator mit Merkmalen verwendet, die auf Co-Vorkommen-Zählungen und flachem semantischem Parsing basieren, um 0.63 F1-Score im Wettbewerb zu erzielen.", 'af': "Semantiese verskil beskrywing probeer om te vang of 'n woord 'n diskriminasiewe eienskap tussen twee ander woorde is. Byvoorbeeld, die diskriminasiewe funksie rooi karakteriseer die eerste woord van die (epel, banana) paar, maar nie die tweede nie. Modelering van semantiese verskil is noodsaaklik vir taal verstaan stelsels, want dit verskaf nuttige inligting vir identifiseer spesifieke aspekte van woord senses. Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel implementasie (die ALB stelsel van die NLP@Unibuc (team) vir die 10de taak van die SemEval 2018 werkshop, 'Opneem diskriminatiewe eienskappe'. Ons voorstel 'n metode vir semantiese verskil beskrywing wat gebruik 'n SVM klassifiseerder met funksies gebaseer op saam- voorkoms tel en slag semantiese verwerking, tot 0. 63 F1 telling in die samekoms.", 'ko': "의미 차이 검출은 한 단어가 다른 두 단어 간의 차이 속성인지 포착하려고 한다.예를 들어 구별 특징인 빨간색은 두 번째 단어가 아닌 (사과, 바나나) 쌍의 첫 번째 단어를 대표한다.의미 차이 모델링은 언어 이해 시스템에 매우 중요하다. 왜냐하면 단어의 의미를 식별하는 특정한 측면에 유용한 정보를 제공하기 때문이다.본 논문은 우리의 시스템 실현(ALB 시스템)을 묘사하였다.NLP@Unibuc팀원) 2018년 SemEval 워크숍의 열 번째 임무인'변별 속성 포착'에 참여한다.우리는 공현계수와 얕은층의 의미 분석을 바탕으로 벡터기 분류기의 의미 차이 측정 방법을 지원하여 경기에서 0.63의 F1점수를 얻었다.", 'am': 'በሁለት ቃላት መካከል ቃላት የተለየ ውጤት መሆኑን ማግኘት ይፈልጋል፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ የተለያዩ ቀይ ቃላት የፊተኛውን ቃላት (Apple, banana) ሁለት ሁለት ነው እንጂ ሁለተኛው አይደለም፡፡ የቋንቋ ማስተዋል ስርዓት ማህበረሰብ ለቋንቋ ግንኙነት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የስርዓታችንን ማድረግ ይናገራል (የALB ስርዓት) NLP@Unibuc የሴmEval 2018 ሰርቨርስቲ አሥረኛ ሰርቨር ‹ልማድ ተግባር›› የ.63 F1 score በክፍለ ቁጥር እና የስሜንቲካ ፓርቲክ ክፍተቶችን በመጠቀም የSVM ክፍተቶችን የሚጠቅመውን የስሜናዊ ልዩነት ማግኘት እናስመክራለን፡፡', 'sw': "Ugunduzi wa tofauti za kijinsia unajaribu kukamata kama neno ni utofauti kati ya maneno mengine mawili. Kwa mfano, utambulisho wa ubaguzi wa rangi unahusisha neno la kwanza kutoka kwa wawili wawili (apple, banana), lakini sio pili. Kutofautiana na mifumo ya kuelewa lugha ni muhimu kwa sababu inatoa taarifa muhimu kwa kutambua masuala maalum ya hisia za maneno. Makala hii inaelezea utekelezaji wa mfumo wetu (mfumo wa ALB wa mfumo NLP@Unibuc Team) kwa jukumu la 10 la warsha ya SemEval 2018, 'Kukamata Wahusika wa Ubaguzi'. Tunazipendekeza njia ya kutambua tofauti za kimapenzi ambazo hutumia mwangazaji wa SVM wenye sifa zilizotokana na idadi ya pamoja na mabadiliko ya kimapenzi yenye mabadiliko mabaya ya kimapenzi, inayofikia score 0.63 F1 katika mashindano hayo.", 'az': "Semantik fərqli tanıtma sözün başqa iki söz arasındakı fərqli bir əlaqədir müəyyən etmək istəyir. Misal olaraq, qırmızı müxtəlif şəkil ilk sözü (alma, banana) çiftindən tanıyır, amma ikincisi deyildir. Semantik fərqliyi modelləşdirmək dil anlama sistemlərinə vacib olduğu üçün, çünki bu söz duygularının özlərini tanıtmaq üçün faydalı məlumat verir. Bu kağıt sistemimizin istifadəsini (ALB sisteminin NLP@Unibuc ( team) for the 10th task of the SemEval 2018 workshop, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes'. Biz semantik fərqli keşfetmə metodu təbliğ edirik ki, birlikdə olaraq sayılara dayanan fərqli seçənlərlə SVM klasifikatını istifadə edir və müqayisədə 0.63 F1 dərəcəsini qəbul edir.", 'tr': "Semantik üýtgeşiklik deteksi sözüň başga iki söz arasyndaky diskriminçä hasaplamagyna synanyşýar. mysal,diskriminäk wajyp gyzyl üçin ilkinji sözü (alma, banana) çiftden karakterlere alýar, ýöne ikinjisi däl. Semantik üýtgeşik düzenlemek diller düşünüp sistemleri üçin wajypdyr, sebäbi ol söz duýgularynyň beýleki aspektlerini tanymak üçin peýdaly maglumat berir. Bu kagyz sistemimiziň implementasiýasyny (ALB sistemasyny) tassyýar NLP@Unibuc (topar) SemEval 2018 sany öwrenişiniň 10-nji işi üçin 'Diskrimi Taýgytlary Capturing'. Biz semantik tapawutlary tanamak üçin bir yöntemi teklip edip otyrýarys. Täzelikde 0.63 F1 अ'a basýar", 'sq': 'Gjetja e ndryshimeve Semantike përpiqet të kapë nëse një fjalë është një atributë diskriminuese midis dy fjalëve të tjera. Për shembull, karakteristika diskriminuese e kuqe karakterizon fjalën e parë nga çifti (molla, banana), por jo të dytën. Modelimi i diferencës semantike është thelbësor për sistemet e kuptimit të gjuhës, pasi ofron informacion të dobishëm për identifikimin e aspekteve të veçanta të ndjenjave të fjalës. This paper describes our system implementation (the ALB system of the  NLP@Unibuc Ekipi) për detyrën e dhjetë të seminarit SemEval 2018, "Kapja e atributeve diskriminuese". Ne propozojmë një metodë për zbulimin e dallimeve semantike që përdor një klasifikues SVM me karakteristika bazuar në numrat e bashkëndodhjeve dhe analizimin semantik të sipërfaqe, duke arritur rezultatin 0.63 F1 në garë.', 'bs': "Semantički otkrivanje razlika pokušava uhvatiti da li je riječ diskriminacijska atributa između drugih dvije riječi. Na primjer, diskriminacija crvena karakterizira prvu riječ od parova (jabuka, banana), ali ne druge. Modeliranje semantičke razlike je ključno za sisteme razumijevanja jezika, jer pruža korisne informacije za identifikaciju posebnih aspekta čula riječi. Ovaj papir opisuje naše implementacije sustava (ALB sistem NLP@Unibuc Tim) za deseti zadatak radionice semiEvala 2018, 'Uhvaćanje diskriminativnih atributa'. Predlažemo metodu za otkrivanje semantičkih razlika koja koristi klasifikatora SVM sa karakteristikama na temelju broja istodogađaja i plitke semantičke analize, ostvarivši 0,63 F1 rezultate na konkurenciji.", 'bn': "সেম্যান্টিক পার্থক্য সনাক্ত করার চেষ্টা করছে যে একটি শব্দ অন্য দুই শব্দের মধ্যে একটি বৈষম্যিক বৈষম্য কিনা। উদাহরণস্বরূপ, বৈষম্যের বৈচিত্র্যময় বৈশিষ্ট্য লাল চিহ্নিত করে (আপেল, বানানা) প্রথম শব্দের বিশেষ করে, কিন্তু  মোডেলিং সেমেন্টিক পার্থক্য ভাষা বুঝতে পারে ভাষার ব্যবস্থার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, কারণ এটি শব্দের নির্দিষ্ট ব এই পত্রিকা আমাদের সিস্টেম বাস্তবায়নের ব্যাপারে বর্ণনা করে (সিস্টেমের এলিবি সিস্টেম NLP@Unibuc সেমইভাল ২০১৮ ওয়ার্কশার্কশালার ১০ তম কাজের জন্য 'বৈষম্যের বৈষম্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ক্যাপ্টেনিং'. আমরা সেমেন্টিক পার্থক্য সনাক্তির জন্য একটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যা এক সংখ্যা এবং সংখ্যার উপর ভিত্তিতে একটি এসভিএম ক্লাসিফার ব্যবহার করে, যা প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিয", 'ca': 'Semantic difference detection attempts to capture whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two other words.  For example, the discriminative feature red characterizes the first word from the (apple, banana) pair, but not the second.  Modeling semantic difference is essential for language understanding systems, as it provides useful information for identifying particular aspects of word senses.  Aquest paper descriu la implementació del nostre sistema (el sistema ALB de NLP@Unibuc (equip) per la 10ª tasca del taller SemEval 2018, "Captura d\'atributs discriminatoris". Proposem un mètode de detecció de diferències semàntiques que utilitza un classificador SVM amb característiques basades en comptes de coincidències i analització semàntica baixa, obtenint 0,63 puntuació F1 en la competició.', 'cs': "Detekce sémantických rozdílů se snaží zachytit, zda je slovo diskriminačním atributem mezi dvěma dalšími slovy. Například diskriminační rys červená charakterizuje první slovo z páru (jablko, banán), ale ne druhé. Modelování sémantických rozdílů je nezbytné pro systémy porozumění jazyků, protože poskytuje užitečné informace pro identifikaci konkrétních aspektů slovních smyslů. Tento článek popisuje implementaci našeho systému (ALB systém NLP@Unibuc tým) pro desátý úkol workshopu SemEval 2018, 'Zachycení diskriminačních atributů'. Navrhujeme metodu detekce sémantických rozdílů, která využívá klasifikátor SVM s funkcemi založenými na počtu koexistencí a mělkém sémantickém parsování, čímž dosahuje 0.63 F1 skóre v soutěži.", 'fi': 'Semanttisen eron tunnistus yrittää saada selville, onko sana erotteleva attribuutti kahden muun sanan välillä. Esimerkiksi erotteleva piirre punainen luonnehtii ensimmäistä sanaa (omena, banaani), mutta ei toista sanaa. Semanttisen eron mallintaminen on olennaista kielen ymmärtämisjärjestelmien kannalta, sillä se tarjoaa hyödyllistä tietoa sanaaistien erityispiirteiden tunnistamiseen. Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmän toteutusta (ALB-järjestelmä, joka NLP@Unibuc SemEval 2018 -työpajan kymmenenteen tehtävään "Syrjintävien attribuuttien kaappaaminen". Ehdotamme semanttisten erojen tunnistusmenetelmää, jossa käytetään SVM-luokitusta, jonka ominaisuudet perustuvat rinnakkaisesiintymislukuihin ja matalaan semanttiseen jäsentämiseen, saavuttaen 0,63 F1-pisteen kilpailussa.', 'et': 'Semantilise erinevuse tuvastamine püüab tabada, kas sõna on kahe teise sõna diskrimineeriv atribuut. Näiteks diskrimineeriv joon punane iseloomustab esimest sõna (õun, banaan), kuid mitte teist. Semantiliste erinevuste modelleerimine on keeleteadmise süsteemide jaoks hädavajalik, sest see annab kasulikku teavet sõnameelte konkreetsete aspektide tuvastamiseks. Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi rakendamist (ALB süsteem NLP@Unibuc SemEval 2018 seminari "Diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamine" 10. ülesandeks. Pakume välja semantiliste erinevuste tuvastamise meetodi, mis kasutab SVM klassifikaatorit, mis põhineb samaaegsete esinemissageduste arvul ja madalal semantilisel parsimisel, saavutades võistlusel 0,63 F1 skoori.', 'hy': 'Semantic difference detection attempts to capture whether a word is a discriminative attribute between two other words.  For example, the discriminative feature red characterizes the first word from the (apple, banana) pair, but not the second.  Modeling semantic difference is essential for language understanding systems, as it provides useful information for identifying particular aspects of word senses.  Այս աշխատանքը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգի իրականացումը ( NLP@Unibuc (թիմ) 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" դասընթացի 10-րդ հանձնարարության համար, «Բռնելով խտրականության առանձնահատկություններ»: Մենք առաջարկում ենք սեմանտիկ տարբերությունների հայտնաբերման մեթոդ, որը օգտագործում է ՍԵՄ դասակարգիչ, որի հատկություններով հիմնված են համապատասխանատվության հաշվարկների և մակերեսային սեմանտիկ վերլուծության վրա, որի արդյունքում ստանում է 0.63 Ֆ1 գնահատական', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje semantične razlike poskuša zajeti, ali je beseda diskriminativni atribut med dvema drugima besedama. Na primer, diskriminacijska značilnost rdeča označuje prvo besedo iz pare (jabolko, banana), ne pa drugo. Modeliranje semantične razlike je bistvenega pomena za sisteme razumevanja jezika, saj zagotavlja koristne informacije za identifikacijo posameznih vidikov besednih čutov. Ta prispevek opisuje našo implementacijo sistema (ALB sistem NLP@Unibuc Za 10. nalogo delavnice SemEval 2018 z naslovom Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov. Predlagamo metodo za odkrivanje semantičnih razlik, ki uporablja klasifikator SVM s funkcijami, ki temeljijo na številu sočasnih pojavnosti in plitvem semantičnem razčlenjevanju, s čimer dosežemo 0,63 F1 rezultata na tekmovanju.', 'jv': "Samar Sampeyan, Diskripatif Layout Perintah sing rambarang nggawe sistem dadi (sistem AlB dhe saben) NLP@Unibuc (Grup) nganggo nggawe 10 uwong sa semebal 2008 Workspace, 'Capturing Diskrim Attribute'.  Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem kanggo tarjamahan semantar dipeneksi sing nambah kelas SVM ingkang cara-cara sing basa gambar nggawe gerarané karo perusahaan semantar, nambah 0.6 F1 dumadhil ning atik dhéwé", 'ha': "Ana jarrabi daban-daban na Semantic ko an sami wata kalma ta zama mai rarrabẽwa a tsakanin wasu kalmõmi biyu. Misali, kifi mai bambanci yana ƙayyade kalma na farko daga 'apple, banana' duk biyu, kuma amma ba na ƙarami. @ action: button Wannan takardan na faɗaɗa zartar da na'uranmu (na'urar AIB na'ura NLP@Unibuc • Team) wa 10 na aikin the SemEV 2018 workspace, 'Taking DiscDiscernible Attitudes'.... Tuna goyya da wata hanyor wa canjeni kemasiki wanda ke amfani da wata SvM mai fassarawa da wasu misãlai da ke samu-samu da parse mai sauri na semantic, da za'a sami score 0.63 F1 a cikin competarin.", 'he': "גילוי הבדלים סמנטיים מנסים לתפוס אם מילה היא תכונה מבחינה בין שתי מילים אחרות. לדוגמא, המיוחד האדום מאפיינים את המילה הראשונה מהזוג (תפוח, בננה), אבל לא השני. דוגמנית הבדל סמנטי היא חיונית למערכות הבנה לשפה, כיוון שהיא מספקת מידע שימושי לזהות אפקטים מסוימים של חושים מילים. המסמך הזה מתאר את הפעלת המערכת שלנו (מערכת ALB של NLP@Unibuc  team) for the 10th task of the SemEval 2018 workshop, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes'.  אנו מציעים שיטה לזהות הבדלים סמנטיים שמשתמשת במסגרת SVM עם תכונות מבוססים על ספירי התרחשות יחד ואבדקת סמנטית שטחית, להשיג נקודת 0.63 F1 בתחרות.", 'bo': "དྲན་བསྐུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར་རྟོགས་ནི་གསལ་ཚིག་གཅིག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆོས་མེད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཞན་གཉིས་དབར དཔེར་ན། discriminationལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དམར་པོ་(apple、banana)གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་དང་པོ་དེ་ཡི་གེ་རེད། སྐད་ཡིག་རྟོགས་པའི་སྔོན་ལྟའི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡིན། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་སྟངས(ALB་གི་མ་ལག་གི་ཨིན་ལུགས་དེ) NLP@Unibuc (team) for the 10th task of the SemEval 2018 workshop, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes'. We propose a method for semantic difference detection that uses an SVM classifier with features based on co-occurrence counts and shallow semantic parsing, achieving 0.63 F1 score in the competition."}
{'en': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Capturing Discriminative Attributes with Knowledge Graphs and Wikipedia', 'ar': 'ELiRF-UPV في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: التقاط السمات التمييزية باستخدام الرسوم البيانية المعرفية ويكيبيديا', 'es': 'EliRF-UPV en la Tarea 10 de Semeval-2018: Capturar atributos discriminativos con gráficos de conocimiento y Wikipedia', 'pt': 'ELiRF-UPV na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Capturando atributos discriminativos com gráficos de conhecimento e Wikipedia', 'fr': 'eLIRF-UPV au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 10\xa0: Capturer les attributs discriminants avec des graphes de connaissances et Wikipédia', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のELiRF - UPVタスク10 ：ナレッジグラフとウィキペディアを使用した差別的属性のキャプチャ', 'ru': 'ELiRF-UPV на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Захват дискриминационных атрибутов с помощью графиков знаний и Википедии', 'zh': 'ELiRF-UPV在SemEval-2018务10:用知图谱与维基百科获别', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर ELiRF-UPV: ज्ञान रेखांकन और विकिपीडिया के साथ भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं पर कब्जा', 'ga': 'ELiRF-UPV ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil le Graif Eolais agus Vicipéid', 'hu': 'ELiRF-UPV a SemEval-2018 10. feladat: A diszkriminatív attribútumok rögzítése tudásgrafokkal és Wikipédiával', 'ka': 'ELiRF-UPV semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 10: დისკრიმიმინატიური ატრიბუტების შექმნა ვიკიპედია', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών με γραφήματα γνώσης και Βικιπαίδεια', 'it': 'ELiRF-UPV a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Catturare gli attributi discriminatori con grafici di conoscenza e Wikipedia', 'kk': 'ELiRF-UPV білім графикалық және Википедия тапсырмасы 10: дискриминациялық атрибуттарды түсіру', 'mk': 'ЕЛИРФ-УПВ на SemEval-2018 задача 10: Фаќање дискриминативни атрибути со знање графики и Википедија', 'lt': 'ELiRF-UPV 2010 m. puslapyje 10 užduotis: nustatyti diskriminacinius požymius su žinių grafikais ir Wikipedia', 'ms': 'ELiRF-UPV di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif dengan Graf Pengetahuan dan Wikipedia', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10: അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ്സും വിക്കിപീഡിയ കൊണ്ടുള്ള ഡിക്മിക്മിനിവ് ഗ്രാഫ്സുകളും ക്യാപ്റ്റിപ്പിറ്റ് ച', 'mt': 'ELiRF-UPV f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 10: Il-Qbid ta’ Attributi Diskriminattivi b’Grafiki tal-Għarfien u l-Wikipedia', 'no': 'ELiRF-UPV på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 10: Oppfatting av diskriminate attributt med kjennende graf og Wikipedia', 'pl': 'ELIRF-UPV na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Przechwytywanie dyskryminacyjnych atrybutów za pomocą wykresów wiedzy i Wikipedii', 'mn': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Discriminate Attributes with Knowledge Graphs and Wikipedia', 'ro': 'ELiRF-UPV la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii cu grafice de cunoștințe și Wikipedia', 'sr': 'ELiRF-UPV na zadatku 10. polovice 2018: uhvativanje diskriminativnih atributa sa znanstvenim grafama i Wikipedijom', 'si': 'ELiRF-UPV at semeval-2018 Job 10: Capture discriminative Attibutes with KnowKnowKnow Graphs and Wikipedia', 'sv': 'ELiRF-UPV på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Att fånga diskriminerande attribut med kunskapsgrafer och Wikipedia', 'so': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes with Knowledge Graphs and Wikipedia', 'ur': 'ELiRF-UPV SemEval-2018 Task 10: Knowledge Graphs and Wikipedia کے ساتھ Discriminate Attributes Capturing', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 10: அறிவு வரைபடங்கள் மற்றும் விகிபிடியாவுடன் கைத்துக் கொள்ளும் Discriminative Attributes', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 vazifa 10: Known Grafs va Wikipedia bilan diqqatlash atributlarni qabul qilish', 'vi': 'Việc làm của SemEvl-208: Bắt được những thuộc tính riêng với Đồ họa Kiến thức và Wikipedia.', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Заснемане на дискриминационни атрибути с графики на знанието и Уикипедия', 'nl': 'ELIRF-UPV op SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Het vastleggen van discriminerende attributen met kennisgrafieken en Wikipedia', 'da': 'ELiRF-UPV på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Indfangelse af diskriminatoriske attributter med vidensgrafer og Wikipedia', 'hr': 'ELiRF-UPV na zadatku 10. polovice 2018: uklanjanje diskriminacijskih atributa sa znanstvenim grafama i Wikipedijom', 'de': 'ELIRF-UPV bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute mit Wissensgrafiken und Wikipedia', 'id': 'ELiRF-UPV di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif dengan Graf Pengetahuan dan Wikipedia', 'ko': 'EliRF UPV가SemEval-18 퀘스트 10: 지식도와 위키백과를 이용하여 구분적 속성 얻기', 'fa': 'ELiRF-UPV در ماموریت ۱۰-۲۰۱۸: دستگیر کردن خصوصیات جدایی با گرافهای دانش و ویکیپدیا', 'sw': 'ELiRF-UPV katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 10: Kukamata Vifaa vya Ubaguzi na Ujuzi na Wikipedia', 'tr': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes with Knowledge Graphs and Wikipedia', 'af': 'ELiRF-UPV by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 10: Opneem diskriminieerde eienskappe met kennis grafe en Wikipedia', 'sq': 'ELiRF-UPV në SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes with Knowledge Graphs and Wikipedia', 'am': 'ስራ 10:', 'hy': 'ELiRF-UPV-ը ՍեմԵվալ-2018-ի 10-րդ հանձնարարությունում. Գիտելու գրաֆիկներով և Վիքիփեդիայով բռնելը տարբերակային առանձնահատկություններ', 'az': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Discriminativ Attributes with Knowledge Graphs and Wikipedia Capturing', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ইলিআরএফ-উপিভি: জ্ঞান গ্রাফ এবং উইকিপিডিয়ার সাথে বৈষম্যের বৈষম্যের বৈষম্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীকে ক্য', 'ca': 'ELiRF-UPV a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capture Discriminative Attributes with Knowledge Graphs and Wikipedia', 'bs': 'ELiRF-UPV na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 10: uhićenje diskriminativnih atributa sa znanstvenim grafama i Wikipedijom', 'cs': 'Úkol 10: Zachycení diskriminačních atributů pomocí znalostních grafů a Wikipedie', 'et': 'ELiRF-UPV SemEval-2018 ülesanne 10: diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamine teadmisgraafikute ja Vikipeediaga', 'fi': 'ELiRF-UPV SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Syrjinnyttävien attribuuttien kaappaaminen tietokaavioiden ja Wikipedian avulla', 'jv': 'eliRF-UNV at semiinval-2008', 'sk': 'ELiRF-UPV na SemEval-2018 naloga 10: Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov z grafikoni znanja in Wikipedijo', 'ha': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEV-2018 Tafiyar 10: Grabbing Discernible Attitutes with Cilm Graffis and Wipeedia', 'he': 'ELiRF-UPV ב SemEval-2018 משימה 10: תפיסת תוויות דיסקרמינציות עם גרפי ידע ויקיפדיה', 'bo': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing Discriminative Attributes with Knowledge Graphs and Wikipedia'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the participation of ELiRF-UPV team at task 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, of SemEval-2018. Our best approach consists of using ConceptNet, Wikipedia and NumberBatch embeddings in order to stablish relationships between concepts and attributes. Furthermore, this system achieves competitive results in the official evaluation.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركة فريق ELiRF-UPV في المهمة 10 ، التقاط السمات المميزة ، في SemEval-2018. يتمثل أفضل نهج لدينا في استخدام حفلات الزفاف ConceptNet و Wikipedia و NumberBatch من أجل إقامة العلاقات بين المفاهيم والسمات. علاوة على ذلك ، يحقق هذا النظام نتائج تنافسية في التقييم الرسمي.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a participação da equipe ELiRF-UPV na tarefa 10, Capturando Atributos Discriminativos, do SemEval-2018. Nossa melhor abordagem consiste em usar embeddings ConceptNet, Wikipedia e NumberBatch para estabelecer relações entre conceitos e atributos. Além disso, este sistema alcança resultados competitivos na avaliação oficial.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe la participación del equipo de ELIRF-UPV en la tarea 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, de SemEval-2018. Nuestro mejor enfoque consiste en utilizar incrustaciones de ConceptNet, Wikipedia y NumberBatch para establecer relaciones entre conceptos y atributos. Además, este sistema logra resultados competitivos en la evaluación oficial.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la participation de l'équipe eLIRF-UPV à la tâche 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, de SemEval-2018. Notre meilleure approche consiste à utiliser les intégrations ConceptNet, Wikipedia et NumberBatch afin d'établir des relations entre les concepts et les attributs. De plus, ce système obtient des résultats compétitifs lors de l'évaluation officielle.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018のタスク10「差別的属性の捕捉」におけるELiRF - UPVチームの参加について説明する。当社の最善のアプローチは、概念と属性の間の関係を安定させるために、ConceptNet、Wikipedia、およびNumberBatchの埋め込みを使用することです。さらに、このシステムは、公式評価で競争的な結果を達成します。', 'zh': '本文述EEmEval-2018事10"获判属性"ELiRF-UPV团队与焉。 至法包ConceptNet,Wikipedia嵌NumberBatch,以立名性。 此外系统于官方评估中取竞争力。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर कार्य 10 पर ELiRF-UPV टीम की भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है, SemEval-2018 के भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करता है। हमारे सबसे अच्छे दृष्टिकोण में अवधारणाओं और विशेषताओं के बीच संबंधों को स्थिर करने के लिए कॉन्सेप्टनेट, विकिपीडिया और नंबरबैच एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करना शामिल है। इसके अलावा, यह प्रणाली आधिकारिक मूल्यांकन में प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त करती है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается участие команды ELiRF-UPV в задаче 10 «Захват дискриминационных признаков» SemEval-2018. Наш лучший подход заключается в использовании вложений ConceptNet, Wikipedia и NumberBatch для установления связей между понятиями и атрибутами. Кроме того, эта система обеспечивает достижение конкурентных результатов в ходе официальной оценки.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar rannpháirtíocht fhoireann ELiRF-UPV ag tasc 10, Ag Gabháil Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha, de SemEval-2018. Is éard atá sa chur chuige is fearr atá againn ná úsáid a bhaint as leabú ConceptNet, Vicipéid agus NumberBatch chun caidreamh a bhunú idir coincheapa agus tréithe. Ina theannta sin, baineann an córas seo torthaí iomaíocha amach sa mheastóireacht oifigiúil.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერს ELiRF-UPV ჯგუფის დაწყვეტილება სამუშაო ატრიბუტებში, სამუშაო-2018 დოკუმენტიური ატრიბუტების დაწყვეტილება. ჩვენი საუკეთესო პროგრამა consists of using ConceptNet, Wikipedia and NumberBatch embeddings for stabilizing relationships between concepts and attributes. დამატებით, ეს სისტემა კონსპექტიური შედეგების შესაძლებლობა პროფიციალურ оценებაში.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az ELiRF-UPV csapat részvételét a SemEval-2018 10. feladatában, a diszkriminatív attribútumok rögzítése címmel. Legjobb megközelítésünk a ConceptNet, a Wikipedia és a NumberBatch beágyazások használatából áll, hogy stabilizáljuk a fogalmak és attribútumok közötti kapcsolatokat. Ezen túlmenően ez a rendszer versenyképes eredményeket ér el a hivatalos értékelés során.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la partecipazione del team ELiRF-UPV al compito 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, di SemEval-2018. Il nostro approccio migliore consiste nell'utilizzare le incorporazioni ConceptNet, Wikipedia e NumberBatch al fine di stabilire le relazioni tra concetti e attributi. Inoltre, questo sistema raggiunge risultati competitivi nella valutazione ufficiale.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή της ομάδας ΕΛiRF-UPV στο έργο 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, του SemEval-2018. Η καλύτερη προσέγγιση μας συνίσταται στη χρήση ενσωμάτωσης για τη σταθεροποίηση των σχέσεων μεταξύ εννοιών και χαρακτηριστικών. Επιπλέον, το σύστημα αυτό επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα στην επίσημη αξιολόγηση.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ELiRF-UPV тобының 10- тапсырманың қатынасын, дискриминациялық аттрибуттарды, SemEval- 2018 дегеннің қатынасын таңдайды. Біздің ең жақсы тәсілдеріміз концепциялық, Википедия және Нөмір Батша индекстерін қолдану үшін концепциялық мен атрибуттардың қатынасын құрастыру үшін. Сонымен қатар, бұл жүйе официалдық оқиғаларының соғыс нәтижесін жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'This paper describes the participation of ELiRF-UPV team at task 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, of SemEval-2018.  Нашиот најдобар пристап се користи од употребата на ConceptNet, Wikipedia и NumberBatch вградувања со цел да се воспостават односи помеѓу концептите и атрибутите. Покрај тоа, овој систем постигнува конкурентни резултати во официјалната оценка.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan participasi pasukan ELiRF-UPV pada tugas 10, Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif, dari SemEval-2018. Our best approach consists of using ConceptNet, Wikipedia and NumberBatch embeddings in order to stablish relationships between concepts and attributes.  Selain itu, sistem ini mencapai keputusan kompetitif dalam penilaian rasmi.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas ELiRF-UPV grupės dalyvavimas 10 užduotyje „Capturing Discriminative Attributes“ SemEval-2018. Our best approach consists of using ConceptNet, Wikipedia and NumberBatch embeddings in order to stablish relationships between concepts and attributes.  Be to, pagal šią sistemą atliekant oficialų vertinimą pasiekti konkurencingi rezultatai.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-parteċipazzjoni tat-tim ELiRF-UPV fil-kompitu 10, Qbid ta’ Attributi Diskriminattivi, ta’ SemEval-2018. Our best approach consists of using ConceptNet, Wikipedia and NumberBatch embeddings in order to stablish relationships between concepts and attributes.  Barra minn hekk, din is-sistema tikseb riżultati kompetittivi fl-evalwazzjoni uffiċjali.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь ELiRF-UPV багийн 10 ажлын оролцоог, SemEval-2018 оны дискриминацийн атрибутыг барьж байгааг тайлбарладаг. Бидний хамгийн шилдэг арга зам нь ConceptNet, Wikipedia, NumberBatch-ын хоорондын харилцаа тогтоохын тулд тодорхойлолтуудыг ашиглах юм. Үүнээс гадна энэ систем албан ёсны шалгалтын үр дүнг өрсөлдөг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver deltakaren av ELiRF-UPV-gruppa på oppgåva 10, med å henta diskriminate attributt, av semiEval-2018. Det beste tilnærminga vårt er å bruka ConceptNet, Wikipedia og NumberBatch-innbygging for å stabilisera forholdet mellom konseptar og attributt. I tillegg er denne systemet oppnådd konkurrentiv resultat i den offisielle evalueringa.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d എലിആര്\u200dഫ്-യുപിവി ടീമില്\u200d പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നതിനെ വിവരിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്. 10 ജോലിയില്\u200d ക്യാപ്റ്റന്\u200dസ് ഡിസ്കിമിനി നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല വഴിയില്\u200d കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റ്നെറ്റ്, വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയും നമ്പര്\u200dബാച്ചും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ടാണ്. ആശയങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വ്യവ അതിനുശേഷം, ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ മത്സരത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഓഫീസിലെ വിലാസങ്ങളില്\u200d എത്തുന്നു.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea descrie participarea echipei ELiRF-UPV la sarcina 10, Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii, a SemEval-2018. Cea mai bună abordare a noastră constă în utilizarea încorporărilor ConceptNet, Wikipedia și NumberBatch pentru a stabili relațiile dintre concepte și atribute. În plus, acest sistem obține rezultate competitive în evaluarea oficială.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje udział zespołu ELIRF-UPV w zadaniu 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, SemEval-2018. Nasze najlepsze podejście polega na wykorzystaniu osadzeń ConceptNet, Wikipedii i NumberBatch w celu ustabilizowania relacji pomiędzy pojęciami i atrybutami. Ponadto system ten osiąga konkurencyjne wyniki w oficjalnej ocenie.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje ekipe ELiRF-UPV na zadatku 10, uključujući diskriminativne atribute, semiEval-2018. Naš najbolji pristup se sastoji od korištenja koncepteneta, Wikipedije i numerBatch integracija kako bi ustanovili veze između koncepta i atributa. Osim toga, ovaj sistem postiže konkurentni rezultati zvanične procjene.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver ELiRF-UPV:s deltagande i uppgift 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, SemEval-2018. Vårt bästa tillvägagångssätt består av att använda ConceptNet, Wikipedia och NumberBatch inbäddningar för att stabilisera relationer mellan begrepp och attribut. Dessutom uppnår detta system konkurrensmässiga resultat i den officiella utvärderingen.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුවේ ELiRF-UPV කණ්ඩායම 10 වැඩේ සම්බන්ධ කණ්ඩායමේ සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් පැහැදිලි කරනවා. අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණය තමයි ConcepNet, Wikipedia සහ Numbatch සම්බන්ධයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් ඒ වගේම, මේ පද්ධතිය අධාරික විශ්ලේෂණයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa ku qoran qayb ka qeybqaadashada kooxda ELiRF-UPV shaqada 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, of SemEval-2018. Dhaqdhaqaalahayaga ugu wanaagsan waxaa kamid ah isticmaalka ConceptNet, Wikipedia iyo Number Batch in la stabiyo xiriirka ka dhexeeya fikrada iyo hantida. Sidoo kale nidaamkan wuxuu heli karaa arimaha tartanka oo ku saabsan qiimeynta rasmiga ah.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தின் ELiRF- UPV குழுவின் பகிர்ந்தளிக்கப்படுகிறது, செம்வால்- 2018 செயல் 10, கையடக்கப்படுகிறது. எங்கள் சிறந்த முறையில் கான்செப்ட்நெட், விகிபிடியா மற்றும் எண் பேட்ச் உட்கொண்டுள்ளது, கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும் குணங்கள் இடையே த மேலும், இந்த அமைப்பு போராடும் முடிவுகளை அரசியல் மதிப்பில் பெறுகிறது.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the participation of ELiRF-UPV team at task 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, of SemEval-2018. ہمارا بہترین طریقہ ConceptNet, Wikipedia and Number Batch embeddings کا استعمال کرنا ہے تاکہ نظریں اور آبریٹوں کے درمیان رابطہ ثابت کریں. اس کے علاوہ، یہ سیسٹم رسمی ارزیابی میں مقابلہ کا نتیجہ پہنچاتا ہے.', 'uz': 'Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 tashkilotdagi ELiRF-UPV guruhining qismlarini 10 ish stolida qayta oladi. Our best approach consists of using ConceptNet, Wikipedia and NumberBatch embeddings in order to stablish relationships between concepts and attributes.  Bu tizim rasm qiymatiga rivojlanish natijalarini bajaradi.', 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả sự tham gia của đội HelRF-UPV tại nhiệm vụ 10, Bắt giữ các biểu đồ phụ thuộc SemEvol. Cách tiếp cận tốt nhất của chúng ta là sử dụng sự nhúng tay của ConciptNet, Wikipedia và NumberBatch để thiết lập mối quan hệ giữa các khái niệm và các thuộc tính. Hơn nữa, hệ thống này đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh trong cuộc đánh giá chính thức.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва участието на екипа на ЕИРФ-УПВ в задача 10, Заснемане на дискриминационни атрибути, на СемЕвал-2018. Най-добрият ни подход се състои в използването на вграждания за установяване на взаимоотношения между понятия и атрибути. Освен това тази система постига конкурентни резултати в официалната оценка.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje ELiRF-UPV tima na zadatku 10, uključujući diskriminativne atribute, semiEval-2018. Naš najbolji pristup se sastoji od korištenja koncepteneta, Wikipedia i NumberBatch integracija kako bi se uspostavili odnosi između koncepta i atributa. Osim toga, ovaj sustav postigne konkurentne rezultate u službenoj procjeni.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver ELiRF-UPV-holdets deltagelse i opgave 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, SemEval-2018. Vores bedste tilgang består i at bruge ConceptNet, Wikipedia og NumberBatch embeddings for at stabilisere relationer mellem begreber og attributter. Desuden opnår dette system konkurrencemæssige resultater i den officielle evaluering.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de deelname van ELIRF-UPV team aan taak 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, van SemEval-2018. Onze beste aanpak bestaat uit het gebruik van ConceptNet, Wikipedia en NumberBatch embeddings om relaties tussen concepten en attributen te stabiliseren. Bovendien behaalt dit systeem concurrerende resultaten in de officiële evaluatie.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan parteċipasi tim ELiRF-UPV di tugas 10, Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif, dari SemEval-2018. pendekatan terbaik kami terdiri dari menggunakan ConceptNet, Wikipedia dan NumberBatch embedding untuk menetapkan hubungan antara konsep dan atribut. Furthermore, this system achieves competitive results in the official evaluation.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die Beteiligung des ELIRF-UPV Teams an Aufgabe 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes, von SemEval-2018. Unser bester Ansatz besteht darin, ConceptNet-, Wikipedia- und NumberBatch-Einbettungen zu verwenden, um Beziehungen zwischen Konzepten und Attributen herzustellen. Darüber hinaus erzielt dieses System wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse in der offiziellen Bewertung.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت تیم ELiRF-UPV را در کار ۱۰ توصیف می\u200cکند، دستگیر کردن ویژه\u200cهای جدایی، از نیم\u200cEval-2018. بهترین دستور ما از استفاده از ConceptNet, Wikipedia and NumberBatch شرکت\u200cها است تا رابطه\u200cهای بین مفهوم و ویکیپیدیا را ثابت کند. علاوه بر این، این سیستم نتایج رقابتی در ارزیابی رسمی را به دست آورد.', 'ko': "본고는 EliRF UPV팀이SemEval-18 퀘스트 10의'변별 속성 획득'에 참여한 상황을 묘사한다.우리의 가장 좋은 방법은ConceptNet, 위키백과 NumberBatch 삽입을 사용하여 개념과 속성 간의 관계를 구축하는 것이다.이 시스템은 정부 평가에서 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었다.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz ELiRF-UPV toparyň 10-nji görerde, SemEval-2018-iň diskrimi çözgütlerini Capturing Discriminative Attributes (Attributes, Capturing Discriminative Attributes). Biziň iň gowy metodamyz ConceptNet, Wikipedia we NumBatch birleşmelerini düşünceler we atributler arasynyň ilişkilerini çözmek üçin ullanýar. Munuň üçin bu sistema resmi deňlemekde ýaryşykly netijeleri ýetip bilýär.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier beskrywe die deelnadering van ELiRF-UPV-span by taak 10, beskrywing van diskriminatiewe eienskappe, van SemEval-2018. Ons beste toegang bestaan van die gebruik van ConceptNet, Wikipedia en NumberBatch inbêdings om verhouding tussen konsepte en eienskappe te stabiliseer. Maar hierdie stelsel bereik mededingsresultate in die offisiele evaluering.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ushiriki wa timu ya ELiRF-UPV katika kazi 10, Kukamata Tamko za Ubaguzi, wa SemEval-2018. Hatua yetu nzuri ni kutumia ConceptNet, Wikipedia na Batch Number ili kuthibitisha uhusiano kati ya dhana na hoja. Zaidi ya hayo, mfumo huu unafanikiwa matokeo ya ushindani katika uchunguzi rasmi.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan pjesëmarrjen e ekipit ELiRF-UPV në detyrën 10, Kapjen e atributeve diskriminuese, të SemEval-2018. Përqasja jonë më e mirë përbëhet nga përdorimi i përfshirjeve ConceptNet, Wikipedia dhe NumberBatch me qëllim që të krijojmë marrëdhënie midis koncepteve dhe atributeve. Përveç kësaj, ky sistem arrin rezultate konkurruese në vlerësimin zyrtar.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የሴmEval-2018 የኤሊRF-UPV ቡድን በሥርዓት 10፣ የሥርዓት ምርጫዎችን ያሳያል፡፡ የበለጠ ልግስታችን የኮንስፕትተርኔት፣ Wikipedia እና Number Batch በመጠቀም በአካባቢዎች መካከል ግንኙነትን ለማድረግ ነው፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ ይህ ስርዓት ባለሥልጣዊ ማስታወቂያውን የሚቃወም ፍሬዎችን ያገኛል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է ELiRF-UPV թիմի մասնակցությունը ՍեմԵվալ 2018 թվականի 10-րդ հանձնարարության, Դիսկրմինատիվ առանձնահատկությունների բռնումը: Մեր լավագույն մոտեցումն այն է, որ օգտագործենք Կոնցեպտենթ, Վիքիփեդիա և Թվային բաժանման ներդրումներ, որպեսզի հաստատենք գաղափարների և առանձնահատկությունների միջև հարաբերություններ: Ավելին, այս համակարգը հասնում է պաշտոնական գնահատման մրցակցության արդյունքներին:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮-এর ইলিআরএফ-উপিভি দলের ১০ কাজে অংশগ্রহণের ব্যাখ্যা করছে। আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভালো উপায় হচ্ছে কনসেপ্টনেট, উইকিপিডিয়া এবং নম্বার ব্যাচ ব্যবহার করে ধারণা এবং বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক স্থাপন করার এছাড়াও, এই সিস্টেম অফিসিয়াল মূল্যের কারণে প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল অর্জন করে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje ekipe ELiRF-UPV na zadatku 10, uključujući diskriminativne atribute, semiEval-2018. Naš najbolji pristup se sastoji od korištenja koncepteneta, Wikipedia i NumberBatch integracija kako bi se stabilirala odnosi između koncepta i atributa. Osim toga, ovaj sistem postiže konkurentni rezultati zvanične procjene.', 'az': "Bu kağıt 10-ci görevdə ELiRF-UPV takımının paylaşışılığını, SemEval-2018'nin diskriminatlı Attributlarını kaplanmağını təsdiq edir. Bizim ən yaxşı tərzimiz ConceptNet, Wikipedia və NumBatch birliklərini istifadə etmək üçün məsələlər və tərzimlərin arasındakı bağlantıları sabit etmək üçün istifadə etməkdir. Daha sonra, bu sistem resmi değerlendirmələrin müqayisədi sonuçlarına yetişir.", 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu la participació de l'equip ELiRF-UPV a la tasca 10, Captura d'atributs discriminatoris, de SemEval-2018. El nostre millor enfocament consisteix en utilitzar incorporacions de ConceptNet, Wikipedia i NumberBatch per establir relacions entre conceptes i atributs. A més, aquest sistema aconsegueix resultats competitius en l'evaluació oficial.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje účast týmu ELIRF-UPV na úkolu 10, Capturing Diskriminative Attributes, SemEval-2018. Náš nejlepší přístup spočívá v použití vložení ConceptNet, Wikipedie a NumberBatch za účelem stabilizace vztahů mezi pojmy a atributy. Kromě toho tento systém dosahuje konkurenčních výsledků při oficiálním hodnocení.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan ELiRF-UPV-tiimin osallistumista SemEval-2018:n tehtävään 10, Syrjimättömien attribuuttien kaappaaminen. Paras lähestymistapamme on ConceptNet-, Wikipedia- ja NumberBatch-upotusten käyttäminen konseptien ja attribuuttien välisten suhteiden luomiseksi. Lisäksi tällä järjestelmällä saavutetaan kilpailullisia tuloksia virallisessa arvioinnissa.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse ELiRF-UPV meeskonna osalemist SemEval-2018 ülesandes 10 "Diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamine". Meie parim lähenemisviis seisneb ConceptNet, Wikipedia ja NumberBatch manustamises, et luua seosed kontseptsioonide ja atribuutide vahel. Lisaks saavutab see süsteem ametlikul hindamisel konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi.', 'jv': 'This paper describes the partition of ENiRF-UNV group at task 10, Capturing Diskrim nated Attribute, of semi-2011. Awakdhéwé nggunakake sing wis nambah kontribusi yéwé ngerasakno Koncepnet, Wipediya lan NomBatch. Ngerti tambah, sistem iki iso nggawe barang-barang sing perusahaan kanggo nyelarang offisisi.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את השתתפות של צוות ELiRF-UPV במשימה 10, תפיסת תוויות דיסקרמינציונטיות, של SemEval-2018. הגישה הטובה ביותר שלנו היא להשתמש בתכניות ConceptNet, Wikipedia ומספר Batch כדי לקבוע מערכות יחסים בין הרעיונות והתכונות. בנוסף, המערכת הזאת משיגה תוצאות תחרותיות בערכה הרשמית.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na describe the role of ELiRF-UPV team at aikin 10, Kapturing Discernible Attitutes, of SemEV-2018. Tsarakanmu mafi kyãwo na kamfata da za'a yi amfani da ConceptNet, Wikimedia da Nambar batch masu fito dõmin ya tabbatar haɗi tsakanin zato da zato. Furan haka, wannan na'ura yana sãmun matsalar da yin gaugawa a cikin rabo rasmi.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisano sodelovanje ekipe ELiRF-UPV pri nalogi 10, Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov, SemEval-2018. Naš najboljši pristop je uporaba vdelav ConceptNet, Wikipedia in NumberBatch za vzpostavitev odnosov med koncepti in atributi. Poleg tega ta sistem dosega konkurenčne rezultate pri uradnem ocenjevanju.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ELiRF-UPV ཚོ་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལྡན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་བྱེད་བཞིན་པའི་ SemEval-2018 ་རྣམས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་ཀ་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ རིམ་པེ་ཌི་ཡ་(ConceptNet)དང་ཨང་གྲངས་ཀ་ཆོག་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་མཐུན་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དབར་གྱི་འབ ད་དུང་། མ་ལག་འདིས་གཞུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དཔྱད་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་དཔལ་འབྱོར་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་འབྲས་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Semantic Discrimination based on Knowledge and Association', 'ar': 'الذئاب في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: التمييز الدلالي على أساس المعرفة والترابط', 'es': 'Wolves at Semeval-2018 Tarea 10: Discriminación semántica basada en el conocimiento y la asociación', 'fr': "Wolves at SEMEVAL-2018 Task 10\xa0: Discrimination sémantique basée sur la connaissance et l'association", 'pt': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Discriminação Semântica baseada em Conhecimento e Associação', 'ja': 'Wolves at SemEval -2018タスク10 ：知識と関連付けに基づく意味論的差別', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर भेड़ियों: ज्ञान और एसोसिएशन के आधार पर शब्दार्थ भेदभाव', 'zh': '狼在SemEval-2018务10:基于知联之语义歧视', 'ru': 'Волки на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Семантическая дискриминация на основе знаний и ассоциаций', 'ga': 'Wolves ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Idirdhealú Séimeantach bunaithe ar Eolas agus Comhlachas', 'ka': 'გულები semiEval-2018 დავალება 10: სემანტიკური დისკრიმინაცია', 'el': 'Λύκοι στο έργο 10: Σημαντικές Διακρίσεις βασισμένες στη Γνώση και τη Σύνδεση', 'hu': 'Farkasok a SemEval-2018-ban 10. feladat: Szemantikus diszkrimináció a tudás és az egyesülés alapján', 'kk': 'Білім және ассоцияға негізделген семантикалық дискриминация', 'it': "Lupi a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Discriminazione semantica basata sulla conoscenza e l'associazione", 'lt': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 10 užduotis: Semantinė diskriminacija remiantis žiniomis ir asociacijomis', 'ms': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Semantic Discrimination based on Knowledge and Association', 'mk': 'Волци на SemEval-2018 задача 10: Семантичка дискриминација базирана на знаење и асоцијација', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ ചെന്നായ്ക്കള്\u200d 10: അറിവും സങ്കേതിയും അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ സെമാന്റിക് വിവേചനം', 'mt': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Semantic Discrimination based on Knowledge and Association', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Knowledge and Association based Semantic Discrimination', 'pl': 'Wilki na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Dyskryminacja semantyczna oparta na wiedzy i stowarzyszeniu', 'no': 'Wolver ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 10: Semantisk diskriminasjon basert på kunnskap og assosiasjon', 'si': 'සෙම්වෙල් 2018 කාර්ය 10: සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්වාසය', 'sr': 'Vukovi na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 10: Semantička diskriminacija bazirana na znanju i asocijaciji', 'sv': 'Vargar på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Semantisk diskriminering baserad på kunskap och association', 'so': 'Task 10: Takoorista sinnaanta ku saleysan aqoonta iyo ururka', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 10: அறிவு மற்றும் சமூகத்தின் அடிப்படையிலான பெண்டியல் குழப்பமான', 'ro': 'Lupii la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Discriminarea semantică bazată pe cunoaștere și asociere', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس ۱۰ میں ولیوں: علم اور اتصال پر بنیاد سیمنٹی بحث', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifani 10: Known va Association asosida semantic Discrimination', 'vi': 'Sói ở Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 10: Bố nhục phân xử dựa trên kiến thức và Hiệp hội', 'hr': 'Vukovi na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 10: Semantička diskriminacija na temelju znanja i pridruživanja', 'bg': 'Вълци в Задача 10: Семантична дискриминация въз основа на знанието и асоциацията', 'nl': 'Wolven bij SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Semantische discriminatie op basis van kennis en associatie', 'da': 'Ulve på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Semantisk diskrimination baseret på viden og forening', 'fa': 'گرگ\u200cها در تابع ۱۰ مرحله ۲۰۰۸: پراکندگی سیمانتیک بر اساس علم and Association', 'de': 'Wölfe bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Semantische Diskriminierung auf Basis von Wissen und Assoziation', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 작업 10: 지식 및 관련 의미 인식 기반', 'sw': 'Mmbwa wa ndege katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 10: Ubaguzi wa kimapenzi kwa msingi wa ufahamu na Chama', 'tr': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Semantic Discrimination based on Knowledge and Association', 'af': 'Wolves by SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Semantiese diskriminasie gebaseer op kennis en asosiasie', 'sq': 'Ujqërit në SemEval-2018 Çështja 10: Diskriminim Semantik bazuar në njohuri dhe shoqërim', 'am': 'ስራ 10', 'hy': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Semantic Discrimination based on Knowledge and Association', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের নেকড়েরা ১০: জ্ঞান এবং সংস্থার উপর ভিত্তিক বৈষম্য', 'az': 'Yarım Eval-2018 Task 10: Bilim və Asociasyona dayanan Semantik diskriminasiya', 'bs': 'Vukovi na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 10: Semantička diskriminacija bazirana na znanju i udruženju', 'ca': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Semantic Discrimination based on Knowledge and Association', 'id': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Semantic Discrimination based on Knowledge and Association', 'cs': 'Úkol 10: Sémantická diskriminace založená na znalostech a asociaci', 'et': 'Hundid SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 10: Teadmistel ja assotsiatsioonil põhinev semantiline diskrimineerimine', 'fi': 'Sudet SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Tietoon ja assosiaatioon perustuva semanttinen syrjintä', 'jv': 'Wulken at semebal-2013 task 10: semanti Diskrim ation supported on knowknowknown and Asociation', 'he': 'זאבים ב SemEval-2018 משימה 10: דיסקרמינציה סמנטית מבוססת על ידע ואיגוד', 'sk': 'Volkovi na SemEval-2018 Naloga 10: Semantna diskriminacija na podlagi znanja in druženja', 'ha': 'Taimar 10: Semantic Discernion based on ilmi and association', 'bo': 'Wolves at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Semantic Discrimination based on Knowledge and Association'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2018 shared task 10 ‘Capturing Dicriminative Attributes’. We use a combination of knowledge-based and co-occurrence features to capture the semantic difference between two words in relation to an attribute. We define scores based on association measures, ngram counts, word similarity, and ConceptNet relations. The system is ranked 4th (joint) on the official leaderboard of the task.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام المقدم إلى SemEval 2018 المهمة المشتركة 10 "التقاط السمات الثنائية". نحن نستخدم مزيجًا من الميزات المستندة إلى المعرفة والتواجد المشترك لالتقاط الاختلاف الدلالي بين كلمتين فيما يتعلق بالسمة. نحدد الدرجات بناءً على مقاييس الارتباط ، وعدد ngram ، وتشابه الكلمات ، وعلاقات ConceptNet. يحتل النظام المرتبة الرابعة (مشتركة) على لوحة الصدارة الرسمية للمهمة.', 'pt': "Este artigo descreve o sistema submetido à tarefa compartilhada 10 do SemEval 2018 'Captura de Atributos Dicriminativos'. Usamos uma combinação de recursos baseados em conhecimento e de coocorrência para capturar a diferença semântica entre duas palavras em relação a um atributo. Definimos pontuações com base em medidas de associação, contagens de nggramas, semelhança de palavras e relações ConceptNet. O sistema está classificado em 4º (conjunto) na tabela de classificação oficial da tarefa.", 'es': 'Este documento describe el sistema presentado a la tarea compartida 10 de SemEval 2018 «Capturar atributos dicinativos». Utilizamos una combinación de funciones basadas en el conocimiento y de coocurrencia para capturar la diferencia semántica entre dos palabras en relación con un atributo. Definimos las puntuaciones en función de medidas de asociación, conteos de ngramas, similitud de palabras y relaciones de ConceptNet. El sistema ocupa el cuarto lugar (conjunto) en la clasificación oficial de la tarea.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système soumis à la tâche partagée 10 de SemEval 2018 `Capturing Dicriminative Attributes'. Nous utilisons une combinaison de caractéristiques basées sur les connaissances et de co-occurrence pour saisir la différence sémantique entre deux mots en relation avec un attribut. Nous définissons les scores en fonction des mesures d'association, du nombre de ngrammes, de la similitude des mots et des relations ConceptNet. Le système est classé 4ème (joint) dans le classement officiel de la tâche.", 'zh': '本文引SemEval 2018共之10"获罪属性"之系。 吾以知识与共生之组,以获两单词之间语义异也。 以度量、ngram 数、单词相似性、 ConceptNet 以定义分数。 其统在官排行榜上排名第4(合)。', 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval 2018の共有タスク10「差別的属性の捕捉」に提出されたシステムについて説明します。私たちは、知識ベースの特徴と同時発生の特徴の組み合わせを使用して、属性に関する2つの単語の間の意味的な違いをキャプチャします。関連メジャー、ngramカウント、単語の類似性、およびConceptNet関係に基づいてスコアを定義します。システムはタスクの公式ランキングで4位（ジョイント）にランクインしている。', 'hi': "यह पेपर SemEval 2018 साझा कार्य 10 'कैप्चरिंग डिक्रिमिनेटिव विशेषताओं' को प्रस्तुत किए गए सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है। हम एक विशेषता के संबंध में दो शब्दों के बीच शब्दार्थ अंतर को पकड़ने के लिए ज्ञान-आधारित और सह-घटना सुविधाओं के संयोजन का उपयोग करते हैं। हम एसोसिएशन उपायों, ngram गिनती, शब्द समानता, और ConceptNet संबंधों के आधार पर स्कोर को परिभाषित करते हैं। सिस्टम को कार्य के आधिकारिक लीडरबोर्ड पर 4 वें (संयुक्त) स्थान पर रखा गया है।", 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система, представленная SemEval 2018 общей задачей 10 «Захват дикриминативных атрибутов». Мы используем комбинацию признаков, основанных на знаниях и совместном возникновении, чтобы зафиксировать семантическую разницу между двумя словами по отношению к атрибуту. Мы определяем баллы на основе показателей ассоциации, количества ngram, сходства слов и отношений ConceptNet. Система занимает 4-е место (совместно) в официальной таблице лидеров задания.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a cuireadh faoi bhráid SemEval 2018 tasc comhroinnte 10 `Capturing Dicriminative Attributes'. Bainimid úsáid as meascán de ghnéithe eolas-bhunaithe agus comhtharlú chun an difríocht shéimeantach idir dhá fhocal maidir le tréith a ghabháil. Sainmhínímid scóir bunaithe ar bhearta comhlachais, comhaireamh ngram, cosúlacht focal, agus caidreamh ConceptNet. Tá an córas sa 4ú háit (comhpháirteach) ar chlár ceannairí oifigiúil an taisc.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που υποβλήθηκε στην κοινή εργασία 10 "Καταγραφή δικριτικών χαρακτηριστικών". Χρησιμοποιούμε έναν συνδυασμό χαρακτηριστικών βασισμένων στη γνώση και συνύπαρξης για να συλλάβουμε τη σημασιολογική διαφορά μεταξύ δύο λέξεων σε σχέση με ένα χαρακτηριστικό. Καθορίζουμε βαθμολογίες με βάση τα μέτρα συσχέτισης, τους αριθμούς γκραμ, την ομοιότητα λέξεων και τις σχέσεις ConceptNet. Το σύστημα κατατάσσεται 4η (κοινή) στην επίσημη κατάταξη του έργου.', 'ka': "ამ დოკუმენტის შეტყობინება სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval 2018-ში გაყოფილი საერთო დავალება 10 `დიკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტები დაკავშირება'. ჩვენ ვიყენებთ ცნობიერების და ერთადერთადერთადერთადერთადერთადერთადერთადერთად მოქმედების კომბინციაცია, რომ სემონტიკური განსხვავება ორი სიტყვების განსხვავებას ატრიბუტი ჩვენ განსაზღვრებით მონაცემები აზოციაციის მიზემებზე, ngram, სიტყვების სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვად სისტემა 4-ი (ერთადერთიანი) სამუშაო ლიდერბორდის შესახებ.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдың SemEval- ға жүйесін "Дискриминациялық аттрибуттарды түсіру" 10 жалпы тапсырманы түсіндіреді. Біз білім негіздеген және біріктіру мүмкіндіктерін атрибуттың арасындағы екі сөздер арасындағы семантикалық айырмашылығын түсіндіру үшін қолданамыз. Біз сәйкестік өлшемдеріне негізделген нәрселерді, ngram саны, сөздердің ұқсастығы және ConceptNet қатынастарына негізделген. Жүйе тапсырманың әкімшілік лидер батырмасында 4- ші (біріктірілген) деп тұрады.', 'hu': "Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 megosztott feladatához benyújtott rendszert `Dikriminatív attribútumok rögzítése'. A tudásalapú és együttes előfordulási funkciók kombinációjával rögzítjük a két szó közötti szemantikai különbséget egy attribútumhoz viszonyítva. A pontszámokat asszociációs mértékek, ngram számok, szóhasonlóság és ConceptNet kapcsolatok alapján határozzuk meg. A rendszer a 4. (közös) helyen áll a feladat hivatalos ranglistáján.", 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema presentato all'attività condivisa di SemEval 2018 10 `Catturare attributi discriminatori'. Usiamo una combinazione di funzionalità basate sulla conoscenza e di co-occorrenza per catturare la differenza semantica tra due parole in relazione a un attributo. Definiamo punteggi basati su misure di associazione, conteggi ngram, somiglianza delle parole e relazioni ConceptNet. Il sistema è classificato quarto (congiunto) nella classifica ufficiale del compito.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma sistema, pateikta „SemEval 2018“ bendrai užduočiai 10 „Dikriminacinių požymių sugavimas“. Naudojame žiniomis pagrįstų ir bendro pobūdžio požymių derinį, kad gautume semantinius dviejų žodžių skirtumus, susijusius su požymiu. Mes apibrėžiame rezultatus, pagrįstus asociacijos priemonėmis, ngram skaičiais, žodžių panašumu ir ConceptNet santykiais. Sistema yra ketvirtoji (bendra) oficialios užduoties vadovų tarybos pozicija.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018ലേക്ക് കൊടുത്ത സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു ഒരു വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ സംബന്ധിച്ചിടത്തോളം രണ്ടു വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് വ്യത്യാസം പിടിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ് നമ്മള്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d വിവരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, സംഘങ്ങള്\u200d, വാക്കുകള്\u200d, കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റ്നെറ്റിന്റെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി  The system is ranked 4th (joint) on the official leaderboard of the task.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema ppreżentata lil SemEval 2018 kompitu kondiviż 10 “Il-Qbid ta’ Attributi Dikriminattivi”. We use a combination of knowledge-based and co-occurrence features to capture the semantic difference between two words in relation to an attribute.  Aħna niddefinixxu punteġġi bbażati fuq miżuri ta’ assoċjazzjoni, għadd ta’ ngram, similarità tal-kliem, u relazzjonijiet ConceptNet. Is-sistema hija kklassifikata fir-raba’ (konġunta) fuq it-tabella ta’ tmexxija uffiċjali tal-kompitu.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува системот поднесен на SemEval 2018 заедничка задача 10 „Фаќање дикриминативни атрибути“. Користиме комбинација на карактеристики базирани на знаење и соопстанок за да ја фатиме семантичната разлика помеѓу два збора во однос на атрибут. Ние ги дефинираме резултатите базирани на мерките на асоцијација, бројките на грам, сличноста на зборовите и односите со ConceptNet. Системот е рангиран на четвртиот (заеднички) на официјалниот водечки табла на задачата.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet som er sendt til semiEval 2018 delt oppgåve 10 « Capturing Dikriminative Attributes ». Vi bruker ein kombinasjon av kjennsbaserte og samtidige funksjonar for å henta semantiske forskjellen mellom to ord i forhold til eit attributt. Vi definerer poeng basert på tilknytingsmålar, ngram- tal, ordsimilaritet og ConceptNetrelasjonar. Systemet er sett opp fire (joint) på den offisielle lederbordet i oppgåva.', 'ro': "Această lucrare descrie sistemul trimis la sarcina comună SemEval 2018 10 `Capturarea atributelor dicriminative'. Folosim o combinație de caracteristici bazate pe cunoaștere și co-apariție pentru a capta diferența semantică dintre două cuvinte în raport cu un atribut. Definim scorurile pe baza masurilor de asociere, numarului ngram, similaritatii cuvintelor si relatiilor ConceptNet. Sistemul este clasat pe locul 4 (comun) în clasamentul oficial al sarcinii.", 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar ke SemEval 2018 tugas kongsi 10 'Menangkap Atribut Dikriminatif'. Name Kami menggunakan kombinasi ciri-ciri berdasarkan pengetahuan dan coincidence untuk menangkap perbezaan semantik antara dua perkataan dalam kaitan dengan atribut. We define scores based on association measures, ngram counts, word similarity, and ConceptNet relations.  Sistem ditetapkan ke-4 (bersama) pada papan pemimpin rasmi tugas.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь 2018 оны SemEval-д хэвлэгдсэн системийг "Шүүмжлэх ухааны атрибутыг авах" 10 даалгаварыг тайлбарладаг. Бид мэдлэг дээр суурилсан болон хамтран үйл явдалтай холбоотой хоёр үгийн ялгааг харьцуулахын тулд хэрэглэдэг. Бид холбоотой хэмжээсүүд, ngram тоо, үгний төстэй, ConceptNet холбоотой оноо тодорхойлж байна. Энэ систем ажлын ерөнхийлөгчийн удирдагчдын 4-р (нийлбэр) хэмжээтэй.', 'pl': "Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system zgłoszony do SemEval 2018 wspólnego zadania 10 `Przechwytywanie atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych'. Używamy kombinacji cech opartych na wiedzy i współwystępowaniu, aby uchwycić różnicę semantyczną między dwoma słowami w stosunku do atrybutu. Wyniki definiujemy na podstawie wskaźników skojarzeń, liczby ngramów, podobieństwa słów oraz relacji ConceptNet. System jest czwarty (wspólny) na oficjalnym rankingu zadania.", 'sv': "Denna uppsats beskriver systemet som skickats in till SemEval 2018 delade uppgift 10 `Fånga diktatoriska attribut'. Vi använder en kombination av kunskapsbaserade och samtidiga funktioner för att fånga den semantiska skillnaden mellan två ord i relation till ett attribut. Vi definierar poäng baserat på associationsmått, ngram antal, ordlikhet och ConceptNet relationer. Systemet är rankat 4:e (gemensamt) på den officiella leaderboard för uppgiften.", 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut semiEvalu 2018. zajedničkom zadatku 10 „Uhvatanje kriminalnih atributa“. Koristimo kombinaciju znanja baziranih i saradnjih karakteristika kako bi uhvatili semantičku razliku između dve reči u odnosu na atribut. Definiramo rezultate na temelju mjera asocijacije, broja ngrama, sličnosti riječi i odnosa koncepcioneta. Sistem je četvrti (zajednički) na zvaničnom vodećem ploču zadatka.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ نے سیسٹم کی توضیح دی ہے جو SemEval 2018 میں تقسیم کی گئی تھی۔ ہم نے علم کی بنیادی اور اتفاق کی تعبیر کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ دو کلمات کے درمیان ایک خاص کے معاملہ میں سیمنٹی تفاوت حاصل کریں ہم مشترک اندازے، انگرام شمارے، کلمات مثالی، اور ConceptNet رابطہ پر اسکور کی تعریف کرتے ہیں. اس سیستم کو کام کے رسمی لیڈربورڈ پر چوتھا درجہ ہے.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වේල් 2018 වලට පිළිබඳු පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය විස්තර කරනවා ක්\u200dරියාව 10 `පිළිබඳින් විශේෂ අපි දන්නවය අධාරිත සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් භාවිත කරනවා වචන දෙකක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම් අපි ප්\u200dරමාණය සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂය, ngrams ගණනය, වචන සම්බන්ධ විශේෂය, සහ ConcNet සම්බන්ධ විශේ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියේ වැඩේ අධාරණික ප්\u200dරධාන පාලකයේ 4වෙනි පද්ධතිය (සම්බන්ධ) තියෙනවා.', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka loo soo dhiibay SemEval 2018 oo lagu qaybiyey shaqada 10 `Capturing Dicrime Attributes'. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa isku xiriir aqoonta iyo dhacdooyinka si a an u qabno kala duwanaanshaha labada hadal ee la xiriira sharciga. Waxaannu ku qornaa scoro ku saleysan qaababka ururka, tirada ngram, hadalka isku mid ah iyo xiriirka ConceptNet. nidaamka waxaa lagu saleeyaa hogaamiyaha shaqada ee rasmiga ah ee 4aad (wadajir).", 'ta': "This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2018 shared task 10 `Capturing Dicriminative Attributes'.  நாம் அறிவு அடிப்படையில் மற்றும் செயல்பாடு குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி இரண்டு வார்த்தைகளுக்கும் குணங்களுக்கும் இடையே இரு வார நாம் இணைப்பு அளவுகள், ங்க்ராம் எண்கள், வார்த்தைகள் சமம், மற்றும் ConceptNet தொடர்புகளை அடிப்படையில் மதிப்புகளை வரையறு இந்த அமைப்பு பணியின் அரசியல் தலைவரில் 4வது (joint) நிறுவப்பட்டுள்ளது.", 'uz': "This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2018 shared task 10 `Capturing Dicriminative Attributes'.  Biz ilmiy asosiy va bir xil hodisalar bilan birlashtirish imkoniyatlaridan foydalanamiz, ikkita so'zlar orasidagi semantik o'zgarishni tasavvur qilish uchun. Biz bir xil bogʻlanish takliflarini, ngram sonlarini, so'zlar bir xil va ConceptNet xizmatlarini aniqlash. Tizim vazifaning ofisi boshqaruvchisidagi 4 (bir) chegarasi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống được gửi cho công việc chia sẻ của SemEvol 208 "\'Nhận được các thuộc tính Diriminative." Chúng tôi sử dụng một sự kết hợp các tính năng dựa trên kiến thức và lặp lại để nắm bắt sự khác biệt ngữ pháp giữa hai từ liên quan tới một tập tin. Chúng tôi xác định điểm dựa trên các biện pháp liên quan, engram đếm, từ tương tự, và ConcPTNet. Hệ thống được xếp hạng bốn (điểm chung) trên bảng xếp hạng chính thức của nhiệm vụ.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, представена на споделената задача 10 "Заснемане на дикриминативните атрибути". Използваме комбинация от знание-базирани и съвместни характеристики, за да уловим семантичната разлика между две думи по отношение на даден атрибут. Определяме оценките въз основа на мерките на асоциацията, броя на грамовете, сходството на думите и отношенията на КонцептNet. Системата се класира на 4-то място (съвместно) в официалната класация на задачата.', 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver systemet, der blev indsendt til SemEval 2018 delte opgave 10 `Capture Dicriminative Attributes'. Vi bruger en kombination af videnbaserede og co-forekomst funktioner til at fange den semantiske forskel mellem to ord i forhold til en attribut. Vi definerer scores baseret på associationsmål, ngram tæller, ordlighed og ConceptNet relationer. Systemet er placeret 4. (fælles) på den officielle rangliste af opgaven.", 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft het systeem dat is ingediend bij SemEval 2018 gedeelde taak 10 `Capturing Dicriminative Attributes'. We gebruiken een combinatie van kennisgebaseerde en co-incident functies om het semantische verschil tussen twee woorden in relatie tot een attribuut vast te leggen. We definiëren scores op basis van associatiematen, ngram tellen, woordgelijkenis en ConceptNet relaties. Het systeem staat 4e (gezamenlijk) op het officiële leaderboard van de taak.", 'de': "Diese Arbeit beschreibt das System, das an SemEval 2018 Shared Task 10 `Capturing Dicriminative Attributes' eingereicht wurde. Wir verwenden eine Kombination aus wissensbasierten und Co-Vorkommen Features, um den semantischen Unterschied zwischen zwei Wörtern in Bezug auf ein Attribut zu erfassen. Wir definieren Scores basierend auf Assoziationsmaßen, ngram-Zählungen, Wortähnlichkeit und ConceptNet-Beziehungen. Das System ist Vierter (gemeinsam) in der offiziellen Rangliste der Aufgabe.", 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav podignut semiEvalu 2018. zajedničkom zadatku 10 „Uhvatanje kriminalnih atributa“. Koristimo kombinaciju znanja-baziranih i saradnjih pojedinaca kako bi uhvatili semantičku razliku između dvije riječi u odnosu na atribut. Definiramo rezultate na temelju mjera asocijacije, broja ngrama, sličnosti riječi i odnosa ConceptNeta. Sistem je četvrti (zajednički) na zvaničnom vodećem ploču zadatka.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را توضیح می\u200cدهد که به سم\u200cاول ۲۰۱۸ وظیفهٔ ۱۰ „دستگیر کردن ویژه\u200cهای بیگناه\u200cآور“. ما از یک ترکیب از ویژه\u200cهای همکاری بر روی علم و همکاری استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا تفاوت semantic بین دو کلمه در ارتباط با یک ویژه بگیریم. ما امتیاز\u200cها را بر اساس اندازه\u200cهای اتصال، شماره\u200cهای ngram، شبیه\u200cهای کلمه و رابطه\u200cهای ConceptNet تعریف می\u200cکنیم. سیستم چهارمین (joint) در صفحه رهبر رسمی این کار است.', 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang dikirim ke SemEval 2018 tugas berbagi 10 `Menangkap Atribut Dikriminatif'. Name Kami menggunakan kombinasi karakteristik berdasarkan pengetahuan dan korespondensi untuk menangkap perbedaan semantis antara dua kata dalam hubungan dengan atribut. Kami mendefinisikan skor berdasarkan tindakan asosiasi, hitungan ngram, persamaan kata, dan hubungan ConceptNet. The system is ranked 4th (joint) on the official leaderboard of the task.", 'ko': "본고는 SemEval 2018 공유 임무 10에 제출된'차별적 속성 포획'시스템을 설명한다.우리는 지식과 공현 특징을 바탕으로 한 조합을 이용하여 두 단어 사이의 속성과 관련된 의미 차이를 포착한다.우리는 관련 도량,ngram계수, 단어 유사성과 개념망 관계에 따라 점수를 정의한다.이 시스템은 이 임무의 공식 순위에서 4위에 올랐다.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo uliotolewa kwa SemEval 2018 ulishirikishwa na kazi 10 “Kukamata Wahusika wa Kihalifu”. Tunatumia muunganiko wa misingi ya maarifa na tukio la pamoja ili kukutana tofauti ya kimapenzi kati ya maneno mawili kuhusiana na tamaduni. We define scores based on association measures, ngram counts, word similarity, and ConceptNet relations.  Mfumo huo una cheo cha 4 (joint) katika kiongozi rasmi wa kazi hiyo.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf die stelsel wat na SemEval 2018 gedeelde taak 10 'Opvang van dikriminasiewe eienskappe' gestuur is. Ons gebruik 'n kombinasie van kennis-gebaseerde en saamgebaseerde funksies om die semantiese verskil tussen twee woorde in relatie met 'n eienskap te vang. Ons definieer telling gebaseer op assosiasie-merke, ngram tel, woordgelykheid en ConceptNet-relasies. Die stelsel is rankeerd 4de (joint) op die offisiele leierbord van die taak.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval 2018-nji ýygna gönderilýän sistemiň "Oýun gaýşartmaklyklary Capturing" zadyny tassyýar. Biz bilim tabanly we ýerleşýän çykyşlaryň birleşigini bir atribut bilen ilgili iki söz arasynyň arasynda semantik üýtgeşigini almak üçin ullanýarys. Sayıları birleşme ölçülerine dayanan, ngram sayılara, kelime benzetimi ve ConceptNet ilişkilerine dayanan tanımlarız. Sistem işiň resmi liderliginde 4-nji derejede.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval-ə göndərilmiş sistemi "Dikriminativ Atributları Capturing" 10 paylaşır. Biz elm-tabanlı və birlikdə olanların birləşdirilməsi üçün iki söz arasındakı semantik fərqliyi bir əlaqə ilə əlaqə etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Biz ortaqları ölçülərinə, ngram saylarına, sözlərin bənzəriliyinə və ConceptNet əlaqələrinə dayanan nöqtələri təyin edirik. Sistem işlərin resmi liderlərinin 4. dərəcəsindir.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለSemEval 2018 የተሰኘውን ስርዓት አሥር ‹የግልፅ ምርጫዎች› የሚለውጥ ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ በሁለቱ ቃላት መካከል በሁለተኛው ቃላት ላይ እና በአካባቢው ላይ የተደረገውን የእውቀት እና የሁለተኛውን ግንኙነት ለመቀበል እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የውይይት ቁጥር፣ ንግራም ቁጥር፣ ቃላት እና ConceptNet ግንኙነት በመሠረት ላይ ጥያቄዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የስርዓቱ ባለሥልጣዊ መሪ ላይ 4 (ተካባቢ) የተደረገ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin e paraqitur në SemEval 2018 detyrën e përbashkët 10 "Kapja e atributeve dikriminuese". Ne përdorim një kombinim të karakteristikave të bazuara në njohuri dhe të bashkëndodhjes për të kapur dallimin semantik midis dy fjalëve në lidhje me një atributë. Ne përcaktojmë rezultate bazuar në masat shoqëruese, numërimin e ngram, ngjashmërinë e fjalëve dhe marrëdhëniet ConceptNet. The system is ranked 4th (joint) on the official leaderboard of the task.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut semiEvalu 2018. zajedničkom zadatku 10 „Uhvatanje kriminalnih atributa“. Koristimo kombinaciju znanja-baziranih i saradnje karakteristika kako bi uhvatili semantičku razliku između dvije riječi u vezi s atributom. Definiramo rezultate na temelju mjera asocijacije, broja ngrama, sličnosti riječi i odnosa ConceptNeta. Sistem je četvrti (zajednički) na zvaničnom vodećem ploču zadatka.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৮-এর কাছে প্রদান করা সিস্টেমের বর্ণনা করেছে ‘ক্যাপ্টারিং ডিক্রিমিনিটিভ বৈশিষ্ট্যা আমরা জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিক এবং সংঘর্ষের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করি একটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে দুটি শব্দের মধ্যে দুটি বিভিন্ন পার্থ আমরা সংযোগের মাধ্যমে, ঙ্গ্রাম সংখ্যা, শব্দ, একই সাথে এবং কনসেপ্টনেটের সম্পর্কের ভিত্তিতে স্কোর নির্ধারণ করি। কাজের অফিসিয়াল নেতৃত্ব বোর্ডে এই ব্যবস্থাটিকে ৪ তম (যোগাযোগ) রান্না করা হয়েছে।', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է համակարգը, որը ներկայացվել է 2018 թվականին "Սեմեվալ 2018" ընդհանուր հանձնարարության 10 "Գործել բացատրական առանձնահատկություններ": Մենք օգտագործում ենք գիտելիքներով հիմնված և համապատասխանատվության հատկությունների համակցությունը, որպեսզի ընկալենք սեմանտիկ տարբերությունը երկու բառերի միջև առանձնահատկության հետ կապված: Մենք սահմանում ենք ասոցացիայի չափումների վրա հիմնված գնահատականներ, անգլերենի հաշվարկներ, բառերի նմանության և Կոնցեպտենթ հարաբերությունների վրա: Համակարգը 4-րդ (միավոր) դասակարգվում է խնդրի պաշտոնական առաջնորդների վրա:', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém předložený společnému úkolu SemEval 2018 "Zachycení dikriminativních atributů". K zachycení sémantického rozdílu mezi dvěma slovy ve vztahu k atributu používáme kombinaci znalostních a koexistenčních funkcí. Definujeme skóre na základě asociačních mír, ngramových počtů, podobnosti slov a vztahů ConceptNet. Systém je čtvrtý (společný) na oficiálním žebříčku úkolu.', 'et': "Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2018 jagatud ülesandele 10 `Dikriminatiivsete atribuutide jäädvustamine' esitatud süsteemi. Me kasutame teadmistepõhiste ja kaasesinemise funktsioonide kombinatsiooni, et tabada semantiline erinevus kahe sõna vahel seoses atribuudiga. Määratleme skoorid seoste mõõtmete, ngramide arvu, sõnade sarnasuse ja ConceptNet seoste põhjal. Süsteem on ülesande ametlikul edetabelil 4. kohal (ühine).", 'ca': 'Aquest paper descriu el sistema submetit a SemEval 2018 tasca compartida 10 "Captura d\'atributs discriminatoris". Utilitzem una combinació de característiques basades en el coneixement i la coincidència per capturar la diferència semàntica entre dues paraules en relació amb un atribut. Definim puntuacions basades en mesures d\'associació, números de ngram, similitud de paraules i relacions ConceptNet. El sistema es classifica en la quarta posició (conjunta) en el quadre oficial de la tasca.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2018:n jaettuun tehtävään 10 `Dikriminatiivisten attribuuttien kaappaaminen` lähetetty järjestelmä. Käytämme tietopohjaisten ja rinnakkaisesiintymisominaisuuksien yhdistelmää kuvaamaan kahden sanan semanttista eroa suhteessa attribuuttiin. Määritämme pisteet assosiaatiomittareiden, ngram-lukujen, sanojen samankaltaisuuden ja ConceptNet-suhteiden perusteella. Järjestelmä sijoittuu neljänneksi (yhteisesti) tehtävän virallisessa tulostaulukossa.', 'jv': "Perintah iki rambaran sistem sing nyimpen Samebal 2008 ngejarakno 10 'Capturing Dicrimineative Attribute' Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo kesempatan kanggo sabanjuré karo perusahaan karo semanti kuwi nggawe barang langgar kuwi tindakan karo atiribute Awak dhéwé éngari Puntuan sing basa saben akèh operasi, ngrampun, gambar ngrampun, lan Perintah sing beraksi amben. Sistem sing ditambah tanggal 4 (joint) ning resmi adalah sing nguasai tanggal.", 'sk': "Ta prispevek opisuje sistem, predložen skupni nalogi SemEval 2018 10 `Zajemanje dikriminacijskih atributov'. Uporabljamo kombinacijo znanja temelječih in soobstoječih funkcij, da zajamemo semantično razliko med dvema besedama glede na atribut. Ocene definiramo na podlagi meril asociacije, števila ngramov, podobnosti besed in relacij ConceptNet. Sistem je uvrščen na 4. mesto (skupno) na uradni lestvici naloge.", 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana tsarin da aka saka shi zuwa Semeval 2018 mai shirin aiki 10 `Kapturing Dicriminative Attitullar'.'. Munã yi amfani da komai'in da aka samu'a da ilmi dõmin mu kãma diffaniki tsakanin biyu da maganar zuwa wani halin. Munã ƙayyade score kan asalin haske na haɗi, ƙidãya na ngram, da maganar daidai da ConceptNet. Ana haɗi na'urar na 4th (shirin) kan mai shirya aikin aiki.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟར་ལོངས་པ་(SemEval) 2018་ལ་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་༡༠་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་འབྱུང་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་པ་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ར We define scores based on association measures, ngram counts, word similarity, and ConceptNet relations. དེ་ནི་གཞུང་གིས་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ལག་ཁྱེར་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྡོམ་བཞིན་པ་གཙོ་རིམ།', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שנשלחה לסימEval 2018 משימה משותפת 10 "תפיסת תכונות דיכאומיות". We use a combination of knowledge-based and co-occurrence features to capture the semantic difference between two words in relation to an attribute.  אנחנו מגדירים נקודות מבוססות על אמצעי איגוד, ספירת גרם, דומות מילים, ומערכות יחסים ConceptNet. המערכת מוצבת ב-4 (משותפת) על לוח המנהיגה הרשמי של המשימה.'}
{'en': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Distinguishing Attributes Using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'ar': 'Luminoso في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: تمييز السمات باستخدام Text Corpora والمعرفة العلائقية', 'es': 'Luminoso en SemEval-2018 Tarea 10: Distinguir atributos mediante corpus de texto y conocimiento relacional', 'pt': 'Luminoso no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Distinguindo Atributos Usando Corpora Textuais e Conhecimento Relacional', 'fr': "Luminoso au salon SEMEVAL-2018 Task 10\xa0: Distinguer les attributs à l'aide de corpus textuels et de connaissances relationnelles", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のLuminosoタスク10 ：テキストコーラとリレーショナルナレッジを使用して属性を区別する', 'zh': 'Luminoso在SemEval-2018务10:用文本语料库知分性', 'hi': 'Luminoso पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 10: पाठ निगम और संबंधपरक ज्ञान का उपयोग कर विशेषताओं को अलग करना', 'ru': 'Luminoso на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Различение атрибутов с использованием текстовых корпусов и реляционных знаний', 'ga': 'Luminoso ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Tréithe a Idirdhealú ag Úsáid Téacs Corpora agus Eolas Coibhneasta', 'ka': 'Luminoso (SemEval-2018)', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Διακρίνιση χαρακτηριστικών χρησιμοποιώντας το Σώμα Κειμένου και τη Σχετική Γνώση', 'hu': 'Luminoso a SemEval-2018 10. feladat: Attributumok megkülönböztetése a szövegkorona és a kapcsolati tudás segítségével', 'it': 'Luminoso a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguere gli attributi utilizzando il corpo del testo e la conoscenza relazionale', 'kk': 'Луминозо жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында 10: Мәтін корпорасы мен қатынастық білім қолданылатын атрибуттары', 'mk': 'Луминосо на SemEval-2018 задача 10: Разбирање на атрибути користејќи текст корпора и релативно знаење', 'lt': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguishing Attributes Using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'ms': 'Luminoso di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Atribut Memindahkan Menggunakan Korpora Teks dan Pengetahuan Relatif', 'ml': 'ലുമിനോസോ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10: പദാവലി കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളും വിവരങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളും വെ', 'mt': 'Luminoso f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 10: Attributi Distinguishing Using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'no': 'Luminoso ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 10: Avdelingsattributtar ved bruk av tekstkorpora og relasjonskjenning', 'pl': 'Luminoso w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Rozróżnianie atrybutów za pomocą korpusu tekstowego i wiedzy relacyjnej', 'mn': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguishing attributes Using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'ro': 'Luminoso la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Distinguerea atributelor folosind corpul textului și cunoștințele relaționale', 'sr': 'Luminoso na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 10: Razdvajanje atributa korporacije teksta i vezne znanja', 'so': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Shaqada 10: Distributing Attributes using text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'si': 'Luminioso at semeval-2018 Job 10: Distinguishing Attibutes Using Text CorPora and Associal KnowKnowness', 'sv': 'Luminoso på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Att särskilja attribut med hjälp av textkorpora och relationskunskap', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் லுமினோசோ 10: உரை கோர்போராவை பயன்படுத்தி குணங்களை விலக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguishing Attributes using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'vi': 'Tiếng trống ở Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 10: Đặc thù Dùng Cơ cấu Cơ bản và tri thức tương đối', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 10: Matn Corpora va Relational Knowledge yordamida Attributes Distinguishing', 'hr': 'Luminoso na zadatku 10. polovječna-2018: razdvajanje atributa korištenja tekstskih korpora i veznih znanja', 'nl': 'Luminoso bij SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Attributen onderscheiden met behulp van tekstcorpora en relationele kennis', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Различаване на атрибутите чрез текстов корпор и относително знание', 'da': 'Luminoso på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Udskillelse af attributter ved hjælp af tekstkorpora og relationsvidenskab', 'de': 'Luminoso bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Unterscheidung von Attributen mithilfe von Textkorpora und Beziehungswissen', 'ko': 'SemEval-2018의 Luminoso 작업 10: 텍스트 자료 라이브러리와 관계 지식을 사용하여 속성 구분', 'fa': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguishing Attributes Use Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'id': 'Luminoso di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Atribut Mengerikan Menggunakan Teks Korpora dan Pengetahuan Relatif', 'sq': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguishing Attributes Using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'tr': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguishing Attributes Using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'sw': 'Luminoso katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 10: Kupoteza Wahusika kwa kutumia Simu za Mataifa na Ujuzi wa Kuhusiana', 'az': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguishing Attributes Use Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'am': 'ስራ 10: Distinguishing Attributes using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের লুমিনোসো: টেক্সট কোর্পোরা এবং সম্পর্কিত জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে বিচ্ছিন্ন করার বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'af': 'Luminoso by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 10: Verdelende eienskappe gebruik Teks Korpora en Relatiewe kennis', 'hy': 'Լումինոսոն 2018-ի «ՍեմԷվալ» 10-ի առաջադրանքում. տարբերակող առանձնահատկություններ օգտագործելով տեքստի կորպորա և հարաբերական գիտելիք', 'bs': 'Luminoso na zadatku 10. polovine-2018: Odvajanje atributa korporacije teksta i vezne znanja', 'et': 'Luminoso SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 10: Atribuutide eristamine tekstikorpuse ja suhteliste teadmiste abil', 'ca': 'Luminoso a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguing Attributes Using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'cs': 'Luminoso na SemEval-2018 Úkol 10: Rozlišování atributů pomocí textového korpusu a relačních znalostí', 'fi': 'Luminoso SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Ominaisuuksien erottaminen tekstikorporan ja suhdetiedon avulla', 'jv': 'luMinos at semiinval-2008 task 10: Distingushing Attribute Using Text corporta and Relative knowknowknowness', 'sk': 'Luminoso na SemEval-2018 Naloga 10: Razlikovanje atributov z besedilno korpuso in relativnim znanjem', 'ha': 'Label', 'bo': 'Luminoso at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distinguishing Attributes Using Text Corpora and Relational Knowledge', 'he': 'Luminoso ב SemEval-2018 משימה 10: תפקידים מבחינים באמצעות טקסט Corpora ומדע יחסי'}
{'en': 'Luminoso participated in the SemEval 2018 task on Capturing Discriminative Attributes with a system based on ConceptNet, an open knowledge graph focused on general knowledge. In this paper, we describe how we trained a linear classifier on a small number of semantically-informed features to achieve an F1 score of 0.7368 on the task, close to the task’s high score of 0.75.', 'ar': 'شارك Luminoso في مهمة SemEval 2018 حول "التقاط السمات التمييزية" باستخدام نظام يعتمد على ConceptNet ، وهو رسم بياني معرفي مفتوح يركز على المعرفة العامة. في هذه الورقة ، نصف كيف قمنا بتدريب المصنف الخطي على عدد صغير من الميزات المدروسة لغويًا لتحقيق درجة F1 تبلغ 0.7368 في المهمة ، بالقرب من الدرجة العالية للمهمة البالغة 0.75.', 'pt': 'Luminoso participou da tarefa SemEval 2018 sobre “Captura de Atributos Discriminativos” com um sistema baseado no ConceptNet, um gráfico de conhecimento aberto focado em conhecimentos gerais. Neste artigo, descrevemos como treinamos um classificador linear em um pequeno número de recursos informados semanticamente para obter uma pontuação F1 de 0,7368 na tarefa, próxima à pontuação alta da tarefa de 0,75.', 'fr': "Luminoso a participé à la tâche SemEval 2018 sur «\xa0Capturer les attributs discriminants\xa0» avec un système basé sur ConceptNet, un graphe de connaissances ouvert axé sur les connaissances générales. Dans cet article, nous décrivons comment nous avons entraîné un classificateur linéaire sur un petit nombre d'entités sémantiquement informées afin d'obtenir un score F1 de 0,7368 sur la tâche, proche du score le plus élevé de la tâche de 0,75.", 'es': 'Luminoso participó en la tarea SemEval 2018 sobre «Capturar atributos discriminativos» con un sistema basado en ConceptNet, un gráfico de conocimiento abierto centrado en el conocimiento general. En este artículo, describimos cómo entrenamos a un clasificador lineal en un pequeño número de características informadas semánticamente para lograr una puntuación F1 de 0.7368 en la tarea, cercana a la puntuación máxima de la tarea de 0.75.', 'ja': 'Luminosoは、一般知識に焦点を当てたオープンナレッジグラフであるConceptNetをベースにしたシステムで、「差別的属性の捕捉」に関するSemEval 2018タスクに参加しました。この論文では、タスクの0.75の高いスコアに近い0.7368のF 1スコアを達成するために、いくつかの意味情報に基づいた特徴について線形分類子をトレーニングした方法について説明します。', 'hi': 'Luminoso ने ConceptNet पर आधारित एक प्रणाली के साथ "भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करना" पर SemEval 2018 कार्य में भाग लिया, जो सामान्य ज्ञान पर केंद्रित एक खुला ज्ञान ग्राफ है। इस पेपर में, हम वर्णन करते हैं कि हमने कार्य पर 0.7368 के एफ 1 स्कोर को प्राप्त करने के लिए शब्दार्थ-सूचित सुविधाओं की एक छोटी संख्या पर एक रैखिक क्लासिफायर को कैसे प्रशिक्षित किया, जो कार्य के 0.75 के उच्च स्कोर के करीब है।', 'zh': 'Luminoso与焉SemEval 2018岁之获判属性者,系统于ConceptNet,此专于众知之图谱也。 于本文,述少语义训练线性类器,以成F1得分0.7368,近事之高分0.75。', 'ru': 'Luminoso участвовала в задаче SemEval 2018 «Захват дискриминационных признаков» с системой, основанной на ConceptNet, графике открытых знаний, ориентированном на общие знания. В этой статье мы описываем, как мы обучили линейный классификатор на небольшом количестве семантически информированных признаков для достижения оценки F1 0,7368 в задаче, близкой к высокой оценке задачи 0,75.', 'ga': 'Ghlac Luminoso páirt i dtasc SemEval 2018 ar “Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil” le córas bunaithe ar ConceptNet, graf eolais oscailte dírithe ar eolas ginearálta. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar an gcaoi a ndearnamar oiliúint ar aicmitheoir líneach ar líon beag gnéithe a raibh an fhaisnéis shéimeantach orthu chun scór F1 de 0.7368 a bhaint amach ar an tasc, gar do scór ard an tasc de 0.75.', 'ka': "ლუმინოზო 2018 წლის SemEval-ში 'დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების კაპონტურაცია' სისტემა, რომელიც ConceptNet-ზე ბაზეულია, გახსნილი ცნობიერების გრაფიკი, რომელიც საერთო ცნ ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ აღწერეთ როგორ ჩვენ ლეინერი კლასიფიკაციაში სემონტიკურად ინფორმაციული ფუნქციების პატარა რაოდენობით, როგორ ჩვენ გავაკეთეთ საქმენტიკურად 0,7368 წერტილი F1 წერტილი, როგორც", 'el': 'Η Luminoso συμμετείχε στην εργασία με θέμα "Καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών" με ένα σύστημα βασισμένο στο ένα γράφημα ανοικτής γνώσης που επικεντρώνεται στη γενική γνώση. Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε πώς εκπαιδεύσαμε έναν γραμμικό ταξινομητή σε ένα μικρό αριθμό σημασιολογικά ενημερωμένων χαρακτηριστικών για να επιτύχουμε μια βαθμολογία F1 0.7368 για την εργασία, κοντά στην υψηλή βαθμολογία της εργασίας 0.75.', 'hu': 'Luminoso részt vett a SemEval 2018-as feladatában a "Megkülönböztető attribútumok rögzítése" című feladatban egy ConceptNet-en alapuló rendszerrel, amely az általános ismeretekre összpontosít. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk, hogyan képeztünk egy lineáris osztályozót kis számú szemantikailag tájékoztatott funkcióra, hogy a feladat magas 0,75 pontszámához közel 0,7368 F1 pontszámot érjen el.', 'it': "Luminoso ha partecipato al task SemEval 2018 su 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' con un sistema basato su ConceptNet, un grafico aperto della conoscenza focalizzato sulla conoscenza generale. In questo articolo, descriviamo come abbiamo addestrato un classificatore lineare su un piccolo numero di funzionalità semanticamente informate per ottenere un punteggio F1 di 0,7368 sul compito, vicino al punteggio massimo del compito di 0,75.", 'ms': "Luminoso berpartisipasi dalam tugas SemEval 2018 pada 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' dengan sistem berdasarkan ConceptNet, graf pengetahuan terbuka yang fokus pada pengetahuan umum. Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan bagaimana kami melatih pengklasifikasi linear pada sejumlah kecil ciri-ciri yang diberitahu secara semantik untuk mencapai skor F1 0.7368 pada tugas, dekat dengan skor tinggi tugas 0.75.", 'kk': 'Луминозо 2018 жылдың semiEval тапсырмасына "дискриминалдық аттрибуттарды түсіру" деген жүйесі концепнетте негізделген, ашық білім графикасы жалпы білімдерге назар аударылған. Бұл қағазда, біз сызық классификациялық тапсырманың 0,7368 деңгейіндегі F1 деңгейінде, 0,75 деңгейіндегі жоғары деңгейіндегі кішкентай семантикалық мәліметтерді қалай оқытуды таңдаймыз.', 'lt': "„Luminoso“ dalyvavo 2018 m. SemEval užduotyje „Diskriminacinių požymių gavimas“ naudojant konceptNet grindžiamą sistemą, atvirų žinių grafiką, kuriame daugiausia dėmesio skiriama bendrosioms žinioms. In this paper, we describe how we trained a linear classifier on a small number of semantically-informed features to achieve an F1 score of 0.7368 on the task, close to the task's high score of 0.75.", 'ml': "ലുമിനോസോ കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റെറ്റിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം കൊണ്ട് 'ഡിക്മിനിസ്റ്റേറ്റ് പിടിക്കുന്നത്' എന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d  ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ലൈനാര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിച്ചത്, ഒരു ചെറിയ സംഖ്യ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d 0.", 'mk': 'Луминосо учествуваше во задачата SemEval 2018 за „Фаќање дискриминативни атрибути“ со систем базиран на ConceptNet, граф на отворено знаење фокусиран на генералното знаење. Во овој весник опишуваме како трениравме линијарен класификатор на мал број семантично информирани карактеристики за да постигнеме оценка F1 од 0,7368 на задачата, блиску до високата оценка на задачата од 0,75.', 'mn': 'Луминозо 2018 оны SemEval-д "Discriminative Attributes" гэх мэт ажил дээр "ConceptNet-д суурилсан систем дээр оролцсон. Олон мэдлэг график нь ерөнхий мэдлэг дээр төвлөрсөн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэрхэн шинжлэх ухааны хэмжээний хэмжээний хувилбарыг хэрхэн дасгал хийсэн бөгөөд ажил дээр F1 0.7368 оноо гаргах боломжтой жижиг хэмжээний хэмжээний хувилбарыг тайлбарлаж байна.', 'pl': 'Luminoso uczestniczył w zadaniu SemEval 2018 dotyczącym "Przechwytywania atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych" z systemem opartym na ConceptNet, wykresie otwartej wiedzy skupionym na wiedzy ogólnej. W niniejszym artykule opisujemy, w jaki sposób trenowaliśmy klasyfikator liniowy na niewielkiej liczbie semantycznie informowanych cech, aby osiągnąć wynik F1 0,7368 w zadaniu, blisko wysokiego wyniku zadania 0,75.', 'no': 'Luminoso delta i semiEval 2018-oppgåva på «Capturing Discriminate Attributes» med eit system basert på ConceptNet, eit opna kunnskapsgraf fokusert på generell kunnskap. I denne papiret beskriver vi korleis vi treng ein lineær klassifisering på ein liten tal av semantisk informerte funksjonar for å oppnå eit F1- poeng med 0,7368 på oppgåva, nær høg poeng på oppgåva 0,75.', 'mt': "Luminoso participated in the SemEval 2018 task on 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' with a system based on ConceptNet, an open knowledge graph focused on general knowledge.  F’dan id-dokument, a ħna niddeskrivu kif aħna mħarrġin klassifikatur lineari fuq numru żgħir ta’ karatteristiċi infurmati semantikament biex jinkiseb punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.7368 fuq il-kompitu, qrib il-punteġġ għoli tal-kompitu ta’ 0.75.", 'ro': 'Luminoso a participat la sarcina SemEval 2018 privind "Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii" cu un sistem bazat pe ConceptNet, un grafic deschis al cunoștințelor axat pe cunoștințe generale. În această lucrare, descriem modul în care am instruit un clasificator liniar pe un număr mic de caracteristici informate semantic pentru a obține un scor F1 de 0,7368 pe sarcină, aproape de scorul mare al sarcinii de 0,75.', 'si': "Luminioso සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩේ සැම්වෙල් එක්ක 'විශ්වාසික අභිප්\u200dරතිකාරය' පද්ධතියෙන් පද්ධතියෙන් පද්ධතියෙන්, සාමාන්\u200dය දන්න මේ පත්තරේ අපි පැහැදිලි කරනවා කොහොමද අපි ලේනියාර් විශේෂකයෙක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සැමාන්තික විශේෂකයෙක්ගේ පොඩි සංඛ්යාවක් වලින් ස", 'sr': 'Luminoso je sudjelovao u zadatku SemEval 2018 o "uhvaćenju diskriminativnih atributa" sa sistemom baziranim na koncepciji, otvorenom znanja grafiku fokusiranom na opće znanje. U ovom papiru opisujemo kako smo obučili linearnu klasifikaciju o malom broju semantički informiranih karakteristika kako bi postigli rezultat F1 od 0,7368 na zadatku, blizu visokog rezultata zadatka od 0,75.', 'so': "Luminoso wuxuu ka qeybqaaday shuqulkii SemEval 2018 oo ku saabsan 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' oo ku qoran nidaam ku saleysan ConceptNet, kaas oo ah sawir aqoonta furan oo ku qoran aqoonta guud. Qoraalkan waxaan ku qoraynaa sida a an u tababarinnay fasalka liner oo aan ku tababarinnay nooc yar oo semantically-informed ah si aan u gaadhno koox F1 oo ah 0.7368, taasoo ku dhow scorada sare ee shaqada 0.75.", 'sv': 'Luminoso deltog i SemEval 2018-uppgiften "Capturing Discriminative Attributes" med ett system baserat på ConceptNet, en öppen kunskapsgraf med fokus på allmän kunskap. I denna uppsats beskriver vi hur vi tränade en linjär klassificerare på ett litet antal semantiskt informerade funktioner för att uppnå en F1 poäng på 0,7368 på uppgiften, nära uppgiftens höga poäng på 0,75.', 'ta': "லுமினோசோ செம்வால் 2018 பணியில் பங்கிட்டது கான்செப்ட்ஸ்பெட்ட் நெட்டை அடிப்படையில் 'பிடித்து Discriminative Attributes' என்பது ஒரு கணினியில், ஒரு திறந In this paper, we describe how we trained a linear classifier on a small number of semantically-informed features to achieve an F1 score of 0.7368 on the task, close to the task's high score of 0.75.", 'ur': 'Luminoso نے SemEval 2018 کے تابع میں شریک ہوا "Discriminate Attributes" کے ذریعہ ایک سیستم پر ConceptNet پر بنیاد رکھا تھا، ایک کھلی علم گراف جو عمومی علم پر تمرکز کیا گیا تھا. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے کس طرح ایک لینیاری کلاسیر کی تعلیم کی تھوڑی سیمنٹی طور پر معلوم ہوئی فکرتوں پر 0.7368 کی F1 سکوٹ کو پہنچانے کے لئے تابع کے اوپر سے 0.75 کی جگہ کے قریب ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu hujjatda, biz vazifaning 0.7368 darajadagi 0.7368 darajadagi bir kichkina qismi haqida qanday qanday chiroyl darajasini o'rganishni anglatamiz.", 'vi': "Luminono đã tham gia vào nhiệm vụ của SemEvl 208 về'Bắt giữ những thuộc tính phụ thuộc thuộc lực riêng'với một hệ thống dựa trên ConcPTNet, một đồ thị kiến thức mở tập trung vào kiến thức chung. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả cách chúng tôi đã đào tạo một phân loại tuyến về một s ố các tính năng thông tin nhỏ để đạt được điểm số F1 của 0.7368 về nhiệm vụ, gần với điểm số cao của nhiệm vụ 0.75.", 'bg': 'Луминозо участва в задачата на тема "Заснемане на дискриминационни атрибути" със система базирана на Графика на отворено знание, фокусирана върху общите знания. В тази статия описваме как тренирахме линеен класификатор върху малък брой семантично информирани функции, за да постигнем оценка от 0,7368 по задачата, близо до високата оценка на задачата от 0,75.', 'da': "Luminoso deltog i SemEval 2018-opgaven om 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' med et system baseret på ConceptNet, en åben vidensgraf med fokus på generel viden. I denne artikel beskriver vi, hvordan vi trænede en lineær klassificering på et lille antal semantisk informerede funktioner til at opnå en F1 score på 0,7368 på opgaven, tæt på opgavens høje score på 0,75.", 'de': 'Luminoso nahm an der SemEval 2018-Aufgabe "Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute" mit einem System teil, das auf ConceptNet basiert, einem Open Knowledge Graph, der sich auf Allgemeinwissen konzentriert. In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir, wie wir einen linearen Klassifikator auf einer kleinen Anzahl von semantisch informierten Merkmalen trainiert haben, um eine F1-Punktzahl von 0.7368 für die Aufgabe zu erreichen, nahe dem Highscore der Aufgabe von 0.75.', 'hr': "Luminoso je sudjelovao u zadatku semiEval 2018 na 'uhvatiti diskriminativne atribute' s sustavom baziranim na ConceptNetu, grafikom otvorenog znanja usredotočenim na opće znanje. U ovom papiru opisujemo kako smo obučili linearnu klasifikaciju o malom broju semantički informiranih karakteristika kako bi postigli rezultat F1 od 0,7368 na zadatku, blizu visokog rezultata zadatka od 0,75.", 'nl': "Luminoso nam deel aan de SemEval 2018-taak 'Het vastleggen van discriminatieve attributen' met een systeem gebaseerd op ConceptNet, een open kennisgrafiek gericht op algemene kennis. In dit artikel beschrijven we hoe we een lineaire classificator hebben getraind op een klein aantal semantisch geïnformeerde functies om een F1 score van 0.7368 op de taak te bereiken, dicht bij de hoge score van de taak van 0.75.", 'ko': "Luminoso는 SemEval 2018의'구분적 속성 포획'임무에 참여했는데 그 시스템은 ConceptNet을 기반으로 하고 일반 지식에 전념하는 개방적인 지식 그림이다.본고에서 우리는 소량의 의미 정보 특징에서 선형 분류기를 어떻게 훈련시켜 임무의 F1 득점을 0.7368에 이르게 하고 임무의 높은 점수인 0.75에 가깝게 하는지를 묘사했다.", 'fa': 'لومینوزو در وظیفه\u200cی semiEval 2018 در مورد «دستگیر کردن ویژه\u200cهای جدایی» با یک سیستم بر اساس ConceptNet، یک گراف دانش باز روی دانش عمومی تمرکز می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما توصیف می\u200cکنیم که چگونه یک راهنمایی خطی را روی تعداد کوچک از ویژه\u200cهایی که در طبیعت به طور طبیعت اطلاع داده\u200cاند آموزش دادیم تا یک امتیاز F1 از 0.7368 در این کار برسد، نزدیک امتیاز بالا از 0.75 کار باشد.', 'id': "Luminoso berpartisipasi dalam tugas SemEval 2018 pada 'Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif' dengan sistem berdasarkan ConceptNet, grafik pengetahuan terbuka yang fokus pada pengetahuan umum. Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan bagaimana kami melatih klasifikasi linear pada sejumlah kecil ciri-ciri yang diberitahu semantis untuk mencapai skor F1 0,7368 pada tugas, dekat dengan skor tinggi tugas 0,75.", 'sw': "Luminoso alishiriki katika jukumu la SemEval 2018 juu ya 'Kukamata Vitabu vya Ubaguzi' na mfumo unaoanzishwa na ConceptNet, picha ya wazi ya maarifa ililenga kwenye maarifa ya jumla. Katika gazeti hili, tunaelezea jinsi tulivyomfundisha mwandishi wa simu kwa idadi ndogo ya vipindi vya habari vya kimwili ili kufikia score ya F1 ya 0.7368 katika kazi hiyo, karibu na score ya juu ya kazi ya 0.75.", 'sq': "Luminoso mori pjesë në detyrën SemEval 2018 mbi 'Kapjen e atributeve diskriminuese' me një sistem të bazuar në ConceptNet, një grafik i njohurive të hapura që u përqëndrua në njohurinë e përgjithshme. Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë se si kemi trajnuar një klasifikues linear në një numër të vogël elementesh të informuara semantikisht për të arritur një rezultat F1 prej 0.7368 në detyrë, pranë rezultatit të lartë të detyrës 0.75.", 'tr': "Luminoso 2018-nji ýylyň SemEval işine 'Diskriminat Attributler Capturing' we 'ConceptNet' sistemasyna daýan ýan bir sistem bilen goşuldy. Bu kagyzda, semantik bilen dowam edilen çyzgylyň klasifikatyny nähili tanyşdyryp bilen bu işiň üstünde F1 अ 0,7368 bolan ýagdaýyny tassyýarys.", 'az': "Luminoso 2018-ci SemEval iŇüin …ô 'Discriminativ Attributes' sistemi ConceptNet vasit…ôsil…ô 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' il…ô birlikd…ô yer aldńĪ, a √ßńĪq bilgi grafńĪ genel bilgi √ľz…ôrind…ô odaqlandńĪ. Bu kańüńĪzda, iŇül…ôrin y√ľks…ôk n√∂qt…ôsind…ô 0,7368 d…ôf…ô F1 n√∂qt…ôsini yerin…ô yetirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn √ßox semantik bil…ôn f…ôrqli n√∂qt…ôsind…ô linear klasifikat√ßńĪs ńĪnńĪ nec…ô t…ôhsil etdiyimizi t…ômin edirik.", 'am': 'ሉሚኖso በኮንፒትተር መረብ ላይ የተደረገውን የክፈት እውቀት ግንኙነት በሙሉ እውቀት ላይ የተጠቃሚ ስርዓት በሳምEval 2018 ስርዓት ላይ ተጋጠመ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የስራ ከፍተኛ 0.7368 ደረጃ ቁጥር የ0.775 ደረጃውን ለማግኘት ታናሽ የአፍሪካዊ ምርጫዎችን እንዴት እንዳስተማርን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': "Luminoso participated in the SemEval 2018 task on 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' with a system based on ConceptNet, an open knowledge graph focused on general knowledge.  In this paper, we describe how we trained a linear classifier on a small number of semantically-informed features to achieve an F1 score of 0.7368 on the task, close to the task's high score of 0.75.", 'bn': "লুমিনোসো কনসেপ্টনেট ভিত্তিক একটি সিস্টেমের উপর 'বৈষম্যের বৈষম্য গ্রহণকারী গ্রাফ' নিয়ে সেমইভাল ২০১৮-এর কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছেন। এটি একটি উন In this paper, we describe how we trained a linear classifier on a small number of semantically-informed features to achieve an F1 score of 0.7368 on the task, close to the task's high score of 0.75.", 'ca': "Luminoso participated in the SemEval 2018 task on 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' with a system based on ConceptNet, an open knowledge graph focused on general knowledge.  In this paper, we describe how we trained a linear classifier on a small number of semantically-informed features to achieve an F1 score of 0.7368 on the task, close to the task's high score of 0.75.", 'cs': 'Luminoso se zúčastnil úkolu SemEval 2018 zaměřeného na "Zachycení diskriminačních atributů" systémem založeným na ConceptNet, otevřeném znalostním grafu zaměřeném na obecné znalosti. V tomto článku popisujeme, jak jsme trénovali lineární klasifikátor na malém počtu sémanticky informovaných prvků, abychom dosáhli F1 skóre 0.7368 na úkolu, blízko vysokému skóre úkolu 0,75.', 'et': 'Luminoso osales SemEval 2018 ülesandes "Diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamine" süsteemiga, mis põhineb avatud teadmiste graafikul ConceptNet. Käesolevas töös kirjeldame, kuidas me koolitasime lineaarset klassifitseerijat väikese arvu semantiliselt informeeritud funktsioonide kohta, et saavutada ülesandel F1 skoor 0,7368, lähedal ülesande kõrgele skoorile 0,75.', 'fi': "Luminoso osallistui SemEval 2018 -tehtävään 'Syrjintävien attribuuttien sieppaaminen' yleiseen tietoon keskittyvään ConceptNetiin perustuvalla järjestelmällä. Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme, miten koulutimme lineaarisen luokittelijan pienellä määrällä semanttisesti tietoon perustuvia ominaisuuksia saavuttaaksemme tehtävän F1-pisteen 0,7368, lähellä tehtävän korkeita pisteitä 0,75.", 'af': "Luminoso het deel in die SemEval 2018 taak op 'Capturing Discriminate Attributes' met 'n stelsel gebaseer op ConceptNet, 'n oop kennisgraf gefokus op algemeen kennis. In hierdie papier beskrywe on s hoe ons 'n lineêre klassifiseerder opgelei het op 'n klein aantal semantiese inligte funksies om 'n F1 aantal van 0.7368 op die taak te bereik, naby na die taak se hoë aantal van 0.75.", 'bs': 'Luminoso je sudjelovao u zadatku SemEval 2018 o "uhvativanju diskriminativnih atributa" sa sistemom baziranim na ConceptNetu, grafikom otvorenog znanja usredotočenim na opće znanje. U ovom papiru opisujemo kako smo obučili linearnu klasifikaciju o malom broju semantički informiranih karakteristika kako bi postigli rezultat F1 od 0,7368 na zadatku, blizu visokog rezultata zadatka od 0,75.', 'jv': "luMinosé gampang mulai ing semebal 2020 task ing 'Capturan Diskrim nate Attribute' with a System-supported on Methodnet, an open knowinggraphed centered on General knowingno. Nang paper iki, kita dadi piye carane nyimpen kanggo kelas linear, dadi sematik lan nganggep barang langgar sampeyan siji maneh dumadhi 0.", 'he': 'לומינוסו השתתף במשימה SemEval 2018 על "תפיסת תוויות דיסקרמינציונליות" עם מערכת מבוססת על ConceptNet, גרף ידע פתוח שמוקדם על ידע כללי. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים איך אימנו קלאסיפור לינרי על מספר קטן של תכונות מודיעין סמנטית כדי להשיג נקודת F1 של 0.7368 על המשימה, קרובה לציון הגבוה של המשימה של 0.75.', 'sk': 'Luminoso je sodeloval pri nalogi SemEval 2018 "Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov" s sistemom, ki temelji na ConceptNet, grafu odprtega znanja, osredotočenem na splošno znanje. V tem prispevku opisujemo, kako smo usposobili linearnega klasifikatorja na majhnem številu semantično informiranih funkcij, da bi dosegli rezultat F1 0,7368 na nalogi, blizu najvišjega rezultata naloge 0,75.', 'ha': "Luminoso ya yi shirin aikin Semeval 2018 a kan 'Taking DiscDiscernible Attitus' da wani na'urar da ConceptNet, an fokus wani fassarar ilmi mai bayyanãwa wanda ya yi fassara a kan jama'a. Daga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana yadda muka kõre wani mai fassarar linje a kan wani abu kaɗan na sanarwa na semantically dõmin ya s ãmu wani scori na F1 na 0.7368 a kan aikin, sami na matsayin sarki na aikin 0.7378.", 'bo': "Luminoso 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' ལ་SemEval 2018 ལས་འགན་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གྲངས་རིམ་ཅིག་ལྟར་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།"}
{'en': 'BomJi at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Combining Vector-, Pattern- and Graph-based Information to Identify Discriminative Attributes', 'ar': 'BomJi في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: الجمع بين المعلومات المستندة إلى المتجهات والنمط والرسم البياني لتحديد السمات التمييزية', 'es': 'BoMji en SemEval-2018 Tarea 10: Combinación de información basada en vectores, patrones y gráficos para identificar atributos discriminativos', 'pt': 'BomJi no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Combinando informações baseadas em vetores, padrões e gráficos para identificar atributos discriminativos', 'fr': 'BomJI à SemeVal-2018 Task 10\xa0: Combiner des informations basées sur des vecteurs, des motifs et des graphiques pour identifier les attributs discriminants', 'ja': 'BomJi at SemEval -2018 Task 10: Vector、Pattern、Graphベースの情報を組み合わせて識別属性を識別する', 'ru': 'BomJi на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Объединение векторной, шаблонной и графической информации для выявления дискриминационных атрибутов', 'zh': 'BomJi在SemEval-2018务10:合基于矢量,式与图形,以别属性', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर BomJi: भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं की पहचान करने के लिए वेक्टर-, पैटर्न- और ग्राफ-आधारित जानकारी का संयोजन', 'ga': 'BomJi ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Eolas bunaithe ar Veicteoir, ar Phatrún agus ar Ghraf a Chomhcheangail chun Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Aithint', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'BomJi a SemEval-2018 10. feladat: Vektor-, minta- és grafikalapú információk kombinálása a diszkriminatív attribútumok azonosításához', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Συνδυασμός πληροφοριών με βάση τα διανυσματικά, μοτίβα και γραφήματα για τον εντοπισμό διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών', 'kk': 'БомДжи деген жарым Eval- 2018 тапсырмасы 10: дискриминациялық аттрибуттарды анықтау үшін вектор -, үлгі- мен графикалық мәліметтерді біріктіру', 'it': 'BomJi a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combinare informazioni basate su vettori, modelli e grafici per identificare gli attributi discriminatori', 'lt': 'BomJi 2010 m. SemEval-2018 10 užduotis: derinti informaciją, pagrįstą vektoriais, šablonais ir grafikais, siekiant nustatyti diskriminacinius požymius', 'mk': 'BomJi на SemEval-2018 задача 10: Комбинирање на информации базирани на вектори, шаблони и графици за идентификување на дискриминативни атрибути', 'ms': 'BomJi di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menggabungkan Maklumat Berasas Vektor, Corak dan Graf untuk Mengenalpasti Atribut Diskriminatif', 'mn': 'BomJi at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining Vector-, Pattern- and Graph-based Information to Identify Discriminative Attributes', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ ബോമ്ജി: വെക്റ്റര്\u200d -, പാത്രേറ്റ്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി വരുന്നു', 'mt': 'BomJi f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 10: Tagħrif Kombinat ibbażat fuq il-Vetturi, il-Mudell u l-Grafika biex jiġu Identifikati Attributi Diskriminattivi', 'pl': 'BomJi w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Łączenie informacji wektorowych, wzorcowych i wykresów w celu identyfikacji atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych', 'ro': 'BomJi la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Combinarea informatiilor bazate pe vectori, modele si grafice pentru identificarea atributelor discriminatorii', 'no': 'BomJi ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 10: Kombinerer vektor-, mønster- og grafikkbasert informasjon for å identifisera diskriminate attributt', 'sr': 'BomJi na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 10: Kombiniranje vetora, uzorka i grafičkih informacija za identifikaciju diskriminativnih atributa', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'BomJi at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining Vector-, Pattern- and Graph-based Information to Identify Discriminative Attributes', 'sv': 'BomJi på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Kombinera vektor-, mönster- och grafbaserad information för att identifiera diskriminerande attribut', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 10: வெக்டார் சேர்க்கும் போம்ஜி வடிவமைப்பு குணங்களை அடையாளம் காட்டுவதற்கான தகவல்', 'ur': 'بغیر تقسیم آبریٹوں کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے بوم جی کی عملہ ۱۰: ویکتور-, پٹرن- اور گراف- بنیادی معلومات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'BomCơ at SemEvl-208 Task 10: kết hợp trình bảo vệ, mẫu và Thông tin dựa trên đồ họa để xác định tính phụ thuộc.', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Комбиниране на векторна, шаблонна и графична информация за идентифициране на дискриминационни атрибути', 'da': 'BomJi på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Kombinere vektor-, mønster- og grafbaserede oplysninger for at identificere diskriminerende attributter', 'hr': 'BomJi na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 10: Kombiniranje vetora, uzoraka i grafičkih informacija za identifikaciju diskriminativnih atributa', 'nl': 'BomJi op SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Vector-, patroon- en grafiekgebaseerde informatie combineren om discriminerende attributen te identificeren', 'de': 'BomJi bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Vektorbasierte, Muster- und Graphenbasierte Informationen zur Identifizierung diskriminierender Attribute kombinieren', 'id': 'BomJi di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Mengkombinasi Informasi Berdasarkan Vektor, Pattern dan Graf untuk Identifikasi Atribut Diskriminatif', 'ko': 'SemEval-18에서 Bomji의 작업 10: 벡터, 패턴, 그래픽에 기반한 정보를 결합하여 구분적 속성을 식별', 'fa': 'BomJi در تابع ۱۰ در نیم Eval-۲۰۰۸: اتصال کردن اطلاعات بنیاد گراف برای شناسایی ویژگی\u200cهای جدایی', 'sw': 'BomJi katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 10: Kuunganisha Vector-, Uzalendo na Uzalendo ili Kutambua Vitabu vya Ubaguzi', 'tr': 'BomJi at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining Vector-, Pattern- and Graph-based Information to Identify Discriminative Attributes', 'af': 'BomJi by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 10: Kombineer vektor-, patroon- en graf- gebaseerde inligting om diskrimineerde eienskappe te identifiseer', 'sq': 'BomJi at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining Vector-, Pattern- and Graph-based Information to Identify Discriminative Attributes', 'hy': 'BomD6-ը, 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ" 10-ի առաջադրանքում\' միավորելով վեկտորների, կաղապարների և գրաֆիկների հիմնված տեղեկատվություն, որպեսզի բացահայտենք խտրականության առանձնահատկությունները', 'am': '10: Combining vector-, Pattern- and Graph-based information to identify Discriminative Attributes', 'az': 'BomJi at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Vektor-, Pattern- and Graph-based Information to Identify Discriminative Attributes', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের বোমজি: বৈষম্যের বৈষম্য সনাক্ত করার জন্য কমিউনিং ভেক্টর-, প্যাটার- এবং গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক তথ্য', 'ca': 'BomJi a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining Vector-, Pattern- and Graph-based Information to Identify Discriminative Attributes', 'cs': 'Úkol 10: Kombinace vektorových, vzorových a grafových informací k identifikaci diskriminačních atributů', 'et': 'BomJi SemEval-2018 ülesanne 10: vektori-, mustri- ja graafikapõhise teabe kombineerimine diskrimineerivate atribuutide tuvastamiseks', 'bs': 'BomJi na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 10: Kombiniranje vetora-, uzorka- i grafičkih informacija za identifikaciju diskriminativnih atributa', 'fi': 'BomJi SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Vektori-, kuvio- ja grafiikkapohjaisten tietojen yhdistäminen syrjivien attribuuttien tunnistamiseksi', 'he': 'BomJi ב SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining Vector-, Pattern- and Graph-based Information to Identify Discriminative Attributes', 'jv': 'BomJi at semi-2020 task 10: Kombining vector-, patterns- and Graph-supported information to ID Diskrim nated Attributs', 'sk': 'BomJi na SemEval-2018 naloga 10: Združevanje vektorskih, vzorcev in grafičnih informacij za prepoznavanje diskriminativnih atributov', 'ha': 'BomJi at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 10: Combining', 'bo': 'BomJi at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Combining Vector-, Pattern- and Graph-based Information to Identify Discriminative Attributes'}
{'en': 'This paper describes BomJi, a supervised system for capturing discriminative attributes in word pairs (e.g. yellow as discriminative for banana over watermelon). The system relies on an XGB classifier trained on carefully engineered graph-, pattern- and word embedding-based features. It participated in the SemEval-2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes, achieving an F1 score of 0.73 and ranking 2nd out of 26 participant systems.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة BomJi ، وهو نظام خاضع للإشراف لالتقاط السمات التمييزية في أزواج الكلمات (على سبيل المثال ، الأصفر باعتباره تمييزي للموز على البطيخ). يعتمد النظام على مُصنِّف XGB مُدرَّب على ميزات قائمة على الرسم البياني والنمط والكلمة المصممة بعناية. شاركت في مهمة SemEval-2018 10 حول التقاط السمات التمييزية ، وحققت درجة F1 من 0.73 واحتلت المرتبة الثانية من بين 26 نظام مشارك.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o BomJi, um sistema supervisionado para capturar atributos discriminativos em pares de palavras (por exemplo, amarelo como discriminativo para banana sobre melancia). O sistema conta com um classificador XGB treinado em recursos baseados em incorporação de gráficos, padrões e palavras cuidadosamente projetados. Participou da Tarefa 10 do SemEval-2018 sobre Captura de Atributos Discriminativos, obtendo uma pontuação F1 de 0,73 e ocupando o 2º lugar entre 26 sistemas participantes.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit BomJi, un système supervisé permettant de saisir les attributs discriminants dans les paires de mots (par exemple, le jaune est discriminant pour la banane par rapport à la pastèque). Le système repose sur un classificateur XGB formé sur des fonctionnalités soigneusement conçues basées sur l'intégration de graphiques, de motifs et de mots. Il a participé à la tâche 10 de SemeVal-2018 sur la capture des attributs discriminants, obtenant un score F1 de 0,73 et se classant 2e sur 26 systèmes participants.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe BoMji, un sistema supervisado para capturar atributos discriminativos en pares de palabras (por ejemplo, el amarillo es discriminativo para el plátano sobre la sandía). El sistema se basa en un clasificador XGB entrenado en funciones cuidadosamente diseñadas basadas en incrustación de gráficos, patrones y palabras. Participó en la Tarea 10 de SemEval-2018 sobre Captura de Atributos Discriminativos, logrando una puntuación F1 de 0.73 y ocupando el segundo lugar entre 26 sistemas participantes.', 'ja': '本稿では、ワードペアで識別属性を取り込むための監視対象システムであるBomJiについて説明する（例：スイカよりもバナナを識別するための黄色）。システムは、慎重に設計されたグラフ、パターン、およびワード埋め込みベースの機能でトレーニングされたXGB分類器に依存しています。差別的属性の取り込みに関するSemEval -2018タスク10に参加し、F 1スコア0.73を達成し、26の参加システムのうち2位にランクインした。', 'ru': 'Эта статья описывает BomJi, контролируемую систему для захвата дискриминационных атрибутов в парах слов (например, желтый как дискриминационный для банана над арбузом). Система основана на XGB-классификаторе, обученном тщательно разработанным функциям на основе графиков, шаблонов и вложений слов. Она участвовала в задаче 10 SemEval-2018 по выявлению дискриминационных признаков, получив оценку F1 0,73 и заняв 2-е место из 26 систем участников.', 'zh': '本文述BomJi,此监督系统,所以获单词中判(,黄为蕉西瓜判别性)。 统赖XGB器,器基于精心设计,式销训练。 与SemEval-2018获判10,得0.73F1分,在26参与者统中第二。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर बोमजी का वर्णन करता है, जो शब्द जोड़े में भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए एक पर्यवेक्षित प्रणाली है (उदाहरण के लिए तरबूज पर केले के लिए भेदभावपूर्ण के रूप में पीला)। सिस्टम एक XGB क्लासिफायर पर निर्भर करता है जो सावधानीसे इंजीनियर ग्राफ़-, पैटर्न- और शब्द एम्बेडिंग-आधारित सुविधाओं पर प्रशिक्षित होता है। इसने भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं पर कब्जा करने, 0.73 के एफ 1 स्कोर को प्राप्त करने और 26 प्रतिभागी प्रणालियों में से दूसरे स्थान पर रैंकिंग करने पर SemEval-2018 टास्क 10 में भाग लिया।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar BomJi, córas maoirsithe chun tréithe idirdhealaitheacha a ghabháil i mbeirteanna focal (m.sh. buí mar idirdhealaitheach le haghaidh banana thar watermelon). Tá an córas ag brath ar aicmitheoir XGB atá oilte ar ghnéithe bunaithe ar ghraif, ar phatrún agus ar fhocail atá bunaithe ar leabú. Ghlac sé páirt i dTasc 10 SemEval-2018 maidir le Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil, ag baint amach scór F1 de 0.73 agus ag rangú 2ú as 26 córas rannpháirtí.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a BomJi-t, egy felügyelt rendszert, amely a diszkriminatív tulajdonságok szópárokban történő rögzítésére szolgál (pl. a sárga, mint diszkriminatív a banán a görögdinnye helyett). A rendszer egy XGB osztályozóra támaszkodik, amely gondosan megtervezett grafikon-, minta- és szóbeágyazás alapú funkciókra képzett. Részt vett a megkülönböztető attribútumok rögzítéséről szóló SemEval-2018 Task 10-ben, F1 pontszámot ért el 0,73-ra, és 26 résztvevő rendszer közül 2. helyezést ért el.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το BomJi, ένα εποπτικό σύστημα για την καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών σε ζεύγη λέξεων (π.χ. κίτρινο ως διακριτικό για μπανάνα έναντι καρπούζι). Το σύστημα βασίζεται σε έναν ταξινομητή XGB εκπαιδευμένο σε προσεκτικά σχεδιασμένα χαρακτηριστικά γραφήματος, μοτίβου και ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Συμμετείχε στην εργασία 10 για την καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών, επιτυγχάνοντας βαθμολογία F1 0.73 και κατάταξη 2ου από 26 συμμετεχόντων συστημάτων.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive BomJi, un sistema supervisionato per catturare attributi discriminatori nelle coppie di parole (ad esempio giallo come discriminante per banana rispetto all'anguria). Il sistema si basa su un classificatore XGB addestrato su funzionalità basate su grafici, pattern e word embedding accuratamente ingegnerizzate. Ha partecipato al Task 10 SemEval-2018 sulla cattura degli attributi discriminatori, ottenendo un punteggio F1 di 0,73 e posizionandosi secondo su 26 sistemi partecipanti.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бомДжи, дискриминациялық атрибуттарды сөздердің екі атрибуттарын алу үшін басқару жүйесі (мысалы, сары бананы су белгілерінде дискриминациялық ретінде). Жүйелік құрылған график, үлгі және сөздерді ендіру негіздеген XGB классификаторына тәуелді. Бұл дискриминациялық аттрибуттарды түсіру үшін 10 жарым-2018 тапсырмасына қатысу үшін, F1 0,73 деңгейін жеткізу және 26 қатысушылық жүйелерден 2-ші ретінде қатысу үшін.', 'ka': 'ეს წერტილის გამოსახულება BomJi, სიტყვების დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტებების შესახებ სიტყვებისთვის (მაგალითად, ზური როგორც დისკრიმინატიური ბანანის გარეშე წერტილზე). Name ის გადაწყვეტილია სამუშაო-2018 დავალებში 10 დავალებაში დისკრიმინატური ატრიბუტებზე, რომელიც მიიღეთ 0,73 წერტილი F1 და 26 დაწყვეტილი სისტემაში მეორე წერტილი.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama BomJi, prižiūrima sistema, pagal kurią žodžių porose konfiskuojami diskriminaciniai požymiai (pvz., geltona kaip diskriminacinė bananų atžvilgiu virš melono). The system relies on an XGB classifier trained on carefully engineered graph-, pattern- and word embedding-based features.  Ji dalyvavo 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 10 užduotyje dėl diskriminacinių požymių surinkimo, pasiekė 0,73 F1 rezultatą ir antrą iš 26 dalyvių sistemų.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan BomJi, sistem yang diawasi untuk menangkap atribut diskriminatif dalam pasangan perkataan (cth. kuning sebagai diskriminatif bagi pisang atas melon). Sistem bergantung pada pengklasifikasi XGB dilatih pada ciri-ciri yang berasaskan graf, corak dan perkataan yang direka dengan hati-hati. Ia berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes, mencapai skor F1 0.73 dan ranking kedua daripada 26 sistem peserta.', 'mk': 'This paper describes BomJi, a supervised system for capturing discriminative attributes in word pairs (e.g. yellow as discriminative for banana over watermelon).  Системот се потпира на класификатор XGB трениран на внимателно инженерирани графички, шеми и зборови базирани на вградување. Истиот учествуваше во Целата 10 на Семевал-2018 за заземање дискриминативни атрибути, постигнување оценка F1 од 0,73 и рангирање на вториот од 26 системи учесници.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വാക്കിലെ ജോടികളിലെ വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീകളെ പിടികൂടുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം ബോംജിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു (വെള്ളം മുകളില സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d സൂക്ഷ്മമായി എക്സ്\u200cജിബി ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d പരിശീലനം ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു. സൂക്ഷ്മമായി എഞ്ചിനീയറ്റിയ അത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്കില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. ക്യാപ്റ്റിമെന്റിവിന്റെ ക്യാപ്റ്റീസ്റ്റേറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി അതില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь BomJi-г, үгийн хоёр хэсэгт ялгаатай харилцаа барьж буй системийг харуулдаг. Энэ систем нь анхаарлын инженерийн график, загвар болон үгийг нэвтрүүлэх хэлбэрээр сургалтын XGB хэлбэрээр хамаарна. Энэ нь Дискриминацийн атрибутыг авах талаар 2018 оны SemEval-ын 10 даалгаварт оролцсон, F1-ийн 0.73 оноо гарч, 26 оролцогчдын 2-р оноо гарч ирсэн.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano BomJi, nadzorowany system rejestracji atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych w parach słów (np. żółty jako dyskryminacyjny dla banana nad arbuzem). System opiera się na klasyfikatorze XGB przeszkolonym w oparciu o starannie zaprojektowane funkcje osadzania wykresów, wzorców i słów. Uczestniczył w zadaniu 10 SemEval-2018 dotyczącym przechwytywania atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych, osiągającym wynik F1 0,73 i drugim miejscu z 26 systemów uczestników.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver BomJi, eit oversikt systemet for å henta diskriminasjonale attributt i ordpar (f.eks. gul som diskriminasjon for banan over watermelon). Name Det deltok i oppgåva 10 for semiEval-2018 om å henta diskriminate attributtar, og oppnå ei F1-poeng med 0,73 og rankeringa 2 av 26 deltakarsystemer.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi BomJi, sistema sorveljata g ħall-qbid ta’ attributi diskriminatorji f’pari ta’ kliem (pereżempju isfar bħala diskriminatorju għall-banana fuq il-melon). Is-sistema tiddependi fuq klassifikatur XGB imħarreġ fuq karatteristiċi bbażati fuq l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ grafika, mudell u kliem imfassla bir-reqqa. Huwa pparteċipa fis-SemEval-2018 Task 10 dwar il-Qbid ta’ Attributi Diskriminattivi, li kiseb punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.73 u kklassifika t-tieni minn 26 sistema parteċipanti.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තේ BomJi විශ්වාස කරනවා, විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් වචනයේ අල්ලගන්න බලන්න පද්ධතියක් (උදාහරණය විශේෂ විශේෂ ව Name ඒක සෙම්වෙල් 2018 කාර්ය 10 වෙනුවෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්, F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 0.73 වෙනුවෙන් ලැබුනා, සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් 26 වෙනුවෙන් 2 ප්\u200dර', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie BomJi, un sistem supravegheat pentru captarea atributelor discriminatorii în perechi de cuvinte (de exemplu galben ca discriminant pentru banană față de pepene verde). Sistemul se bazează pe un clasificator XGB instruit pe caracteristici bazate pe grafice, model și cuvinte proiectate cu atenție. A participat la Task 10 SemEval-2018 privind capturarea atributelor discriminatorii, obținând un scor F1 de 0,73 și clasându-se pe locul 2 din 26 de sisteme participante.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje BomJi, nadzorni sistem za uhvaćenje diskriminacijskih atributa u rečnim parovima (npr. žuti kao diskriminacijski za bananu preko vode). Sistem se oslanja na XGB klasifikatora obučenog na pažljivo inženjeriranom grafiku, šablonu i rečima osnovanim na osnovu ugrađenja. Ona je učestvovala u zadatku 10 iz polovine Evala-2018 o kapitanju diskriminacijskih atributa, ostvarila je rezultat F1 od 0,73 i redovito 2 od 26 sustava učesnika.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu qoraa BomJi oo ah nidaam ilaaliya si takoorista ah oo ku qabta labada nooc e e hadalka (tusaale ahaan carrabka midab oo ku takoorista banaan ka sarreeya biyaha). Isticmaalku wuxuu ku xiran yahay fasax XGB ah oo lagu tababaray sawir aad u taqaan, tusaale- iyo hadal ku saleysan. Waxay ka qeybqaadatay Shaqooyinka SemEval-2018 ee ku saabsan qabsashada sinnaanta, dhamaadka koox F1 oo 0.73 ah iyo qiyaastii 2aad oo ka mid ah 26 nidaamka ka qeybqaatay.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver BomJi, ett övervakat system för att fånga upp diskriminerande attribut i ordpar (t.ex. gult som diskriminerande för banan över vattenmelon). Systemet bygger på en XGB-klassificerare utbildad på noggrant konstruerade graf-, mönster- och ordinbäddningsbaserade funktioner. Den deltog i SemEval-2018 Task 10 om att fånga diskriminerande attribut, uppnådde en F1 poäng på 0,73 och rankade 2:a av 26 deltagarsystem.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் போம்ஜி, வார்த்தை ஜோடிகளில் வேறு குணங்களை எடுத்துக் கொள்ள ஒரு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறது (உதாரணமாக மஞ்சள் ந Name SemEval-2018 பணியில் பதில் பங்கிடப்பட்டது, ஒரு F1 மதிப்பு 0. 73 பெற்றது, 26 பங்கீட்டாளர் அமைப்புகளில் இருந்து 2வது வரிசையில் இருந்து.', 'ur': 'This paper describes BomJi, a supervised system for capturing discriminatory attributes in word pairs (e.g. yellow as discriminating for banana over watermelon). سیسٹم ایک XGB کلیسٹر پر امیدوار ہے جو اچھے طریقے سے انجینر کی گراف-, پٹرن- اور کلیزوں پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے۔ اس نے سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۱۰ میں شرکت کی تھی جنہوں نے تقسیم اختیاروں کو کاپیٹ کر دیا تھا، 0.73 سے F1 سکونٹ پہنچ لیا تھا اور 26 مشرکین سیسٹم میں سے دوسری رقم لیا تھا.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz BomJi, so'zlar ikkita so'zlarni olib tashlash uchun taʼminlovchi tizimni anglatadi (m.g. suhbat suv bilan sariq narsa sifatida ko'rsatish mumkin). Name Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả BomJi, một hệ thống được giám sát để bắt những thuộc tính độc tính theo cặp từ (v.v. màu vàng là điều lệch đối với chuối trên dưa hấu). Hệ thống phụ thuộc vào một phân loại XGB được đào tạo dựa trên các tính năng vẽ, mẫu và từ được tạo cẩn thận. Nó đã tham gia vào Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-2008 về việc chụp trả thù phụ thuộc, đạt được điểm F1 của 0.73 và xếp hạng thứ hai trong hệ thống tham gia 26.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft BomJi, een supervised systeem voor het vastleggen van discriminatieve attributen in woordparen (bijvoorbeeld geel als discriminatief voor banaan boven watermeloen). Het systeem vertrouwt op een XGB classificator die is opgeleid op zorgvuldig ontworpen grafiek-, patroon- en woordinsluitingsfuncties. Het nam deel aan de SemEval-2018 Task 10 over het vastleggen van discriminatieve attributen, behaalde een F1 score van 0.73 en scoorde 2e van 26 deelnemersystemen.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver BomJi, et overvåget system til at fange diskriminerende egenskaber i ordpar (f.eks. gul som diskriminerende for banan over vandmelon). Systemet er baseret på en XGB klassificering uddannet på omhyggeligt konstruerede graf-, mønster- og ordindlejringsbaserede funktioner. Den deltog i SemEval-2018 Task 10 om at fange diskriminerende attributter, opnåede en F1 score på 0,73 og rangerede 2. ud af 26 deltagersystemer.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва контролирана система за улавяне на дискриминационни атрибути в двойки думи (например жълто като дискриминативно за банан пред диня). Системата разчита на класификатор, обучен върху внимателно проектирани функции, базирани на вграждане на графики, модели и думи. Тя участва в Задача 10 за улавяне на дискриминационни атрибути, постигайки резултат от 0,73 и класирайки се на второ място от 26-те участващи системи.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje BomJi, nadzorni sustav za uhvaćenje diskriminacijskih atributa u riječnim parovima (npr. žuti kao diskriminacijski za bananu preko vode). Sistem se oslanja na XGB klasifikatora obučenog na pažljivo inženjeriranom grafiku, obrazac i funkcijama na osnovu uključenih riječi. Ona je sudjelovala u zadatku 10 za pola Eval-2018 o uhićenju diskriminativnih atributa, ostvarila je rezultat F1 od 0,73 i redovito 2 od 26 sustava učesnika.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt BomJi, ein überwachtes System zur Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute in Wortpaaren (z.B. gelb als diskriminierend für Banane über Wassermelone). Das System basiert auf einem XGB-Klassifikator, der auf sorgfältig entwickelten graph-, pattern- und wortbasierten Funktionen trainiert ist. Es nahm an der SemEval-2018 Task 10 zur Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute teil, erreichte eine F1-Punktzahl von 0.73 und rangierte Zweiter von 26-Teilnehmersystemen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan BomJi, sistem yang diawasi untuk menangkap atribut diskriminatif dalam pasangan kata (contohnya kuning sebagai diskriminatif bagi pisang di atas melon). Sistem ini bergantung pada klasifikasi XGB yang dilatih pada ciri-ciri berbasis grafik, pola dan kata yang direncanakan dengan hati-hati. Hal ini berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes, mencapai skor F1 0,73 dan ranking kedua dari 26 sistem participant.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ بوم جی را توصیف می\u200cکند، یک سیستم نظارت شده برای گرفتن ویژه\u200cهای جدا و جدا در جفت\u200cهای کلمه (مثال زرد به عنوان جدا جدا برای موزین بر روی آب) است. این سیستم بر روی یک راهنمایی XGB که روی گراف، الگو و ویژگی\u200cهای بنیادی به طور دقت آموزش داده شده است بستگی دارد. در تابع ۱۰ سال ۲۰۱۸ در مورد دستگیر کردن ویژه\u200cهای پراکنده\u200cای با رسیدن امتیاز F1 از ۰.73 و درجه ۲ از سیستم\u200cهای ۲۶ شرکتگر شرکتگر شرکت کرد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea BomJi, mfumo uliothibitishwa kwa kuchukua vifaa vya ubaguzi katika maneno ya jinsia (kwa mfano, rangi ya manjano kama ubaguzi wa banana juu ya maji). Mfumo unategemea mwandishi wa XGB aliyefundishwa kwa ajili ya picha zilizotengenezwa kwa makini, mtindo- na maneno yanayotumika. Alishiriki katika kazi 10 ya SemEval-2018 kuhusu Kukamata Vitabu vya Ubaguzi, kupata kipindi cha F1 cha 0.73 na kuanzia nafasi ya pili kati ya mifumo 26 ya washiriki.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf BomJi, 'n beskermde stelsel vir diskriminasiewe eienskappe in woorde paar (bv. geel as diskriminasiewe vir banana oor watermelon). Name Dit het gedeel in die SemEval-2018 taak 10 om diskriminieerde eienskappe te vang, met 'n F1 aantal van 0,73 te bereik en 2 van 26 deelnaamstelsels te rang.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz BomJi, söz çift hasaplanjak üçin g özleýän sistemasy (ol görnüş suwuň üstünde banana diskrimi ýaly) hasaplaýar. Bu sistem dikkatli inženjeredilen grafik, şatan- we sözleriň daşary edilen üçin bilinmiş XGB klasifikatçysyna ynanýar. Bu ýer SemEval-2018 Taýgynda 10-nji Taýgynda diskrimi çözgütleri taýýarlamak üçin goşuldy, F1 अ 0.73 we 26-nji hat sisteminden ikinji sapar goşulýar.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan BomJi, një sistem mbikqyrur për kapjen e atributeve diskriminuese në çiftet e fjalëve (për shembull të verdhë si diskriminuese për bananën mbi melonin). Sistemi mbështetet në një klasifikues XGB të stërvitur në karakteristika të projektuara me kujdes me grafikë, modele dhe fjalë të bazuara në përfshirje. Ai mori pjesë në Detyrën 10 e SemEval-2018 mbi kapjen e atributeve diskriminuese, arritjen e një pike F1 prej 0.73 dhe renditjen e dytë nga 26 sisteme pjesëmarrës.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም ቦምJi፣ በቃላት ሁለት ዓይነቶችን ለመያዝ የተጠበቀው የባሕር ምርጫዎችን (ምሳሌ ውኃ ማውጣት ላይ የባና ጥቁረት እንደሚሆን ብሎጊ ነው የሚለውጥ፡፡ ስርዓቱ በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት፣ ምረጡ እና ቃላት በሆኑት የXGB መግለጫ ላይ ነው፡፡ የ.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին նկարագրում է ԲոմՋին, որը վերահսկված համակարգ է բառերի զույգերի խտրականության առանձնահատկությունների նկարահանելու համար (օրինակ դեղին՝ խտրականություն բանանի համար ջերմելոնի փոխարեն): Համակարգը հիմնված է XGԲ դասակարգչի վրա, որը սովորեցվել է հիմնականում գծագրային, կաղապարի և բառերի ներգրավման հիմնված հատկությունների վրա: Այն մասնակցեց 2018 թվականի «ՍեմԵվալ» 10-ի «Դիսկրմինատիվ առանձնահատկություններ բռնելու» հանդեպ, հասնելով F1-ի 0,73 գնահատականը և 2-րդ գնահատականը 26 մասնակիցներից:', 'az': "Bu kağıt, sözlərin cütləri ilə müxtəlif qüdrətləri almaq üçün g özləyirli bir sistem BomJi'ni təsdiqləyir (suyun üstündə banana müxtəlif olaraq sarı kimi). Sistem sərt inženjerlənmiş grafik, modellər və sözlər içərisində olanlar üzərində təhsil edilmiş XGB klasifikatçısına təvəkkül edir. O, Diskriminat Atributlarını yakalamaq haqqında, F1 0,73 dərəcəsini və 26 iştirakçı sistemlərindən ikinci dərəcəsini qəbul edir.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি বোমজিকে বর্ণনা করেছে শব্দ জোড়ায় বৈষম্যের বৈষম্যের বৈষম্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ব্যবস্থা ধরার জন্য (উদাহরণস্বরূপ প পানিমেলোনের সিস্টেম এক্সজিবি ক্লাসিফারের উপর নির্ভর করে সাবধানে প্রকাশিত গ্রাফ, প্যানেট- এবং শব্দের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ এটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছিল বৈষম্যের বৈষম্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীকে ক্যাপ্টেনিং করার ব্যাপারে, যার ফলে এফ১ স্কোর পাওয়া যায় এবং ২৬ জন অ', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje BomJi, nadzorni sistem za uhvaćenje diskriminacijskih atributa u riječnim parovima (npr. žuti kao diskriminacija banane preko vode). Sistem se oslanja na XGB klasifikatora obučenog na pažljivo inženjeriranom grafiku, obrazac i funkcijama na osnovu uključenih riječi. Ona je sudjelovala u zadatku 10 za pola Evala-2018 o uhićenju diskriminacijskih atributa, ostvarila je rezultat F1 od 0,73 i redovito 2 od 26 sustava učesnika.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje BomJi, systém sledovaný pro zachycení diskriminačních atributů ve slovních párech (např. žlutá jako diskriminační pro banán nad melounem). Systém spoléhá na klasifikátor XGB vyškolený na pečlivě navržené funkce založené na grafech, vzorech a vložení slov. Účastnila se SemEval-2018 Task 10 o zachycení diskriminačních atributů, dosáhla F1 skóre 0.73 a pořadí druhého ze 26 účastníků systémů.', 'ko': '본고는 포획어의 감별 속성(예를 들어 노란색은 바나나가 수박을 감별하는 것)을 감독하는 시스템을 묘사한다.이 시스템은 그래픽, 패턴, 단어 삽입 기능을 기반으로 정교하게 설계된 XGB 분류기에 의존한다.이 회사는 SemEval-18 퀘스트 10에서 변별 속성 획득에 관한 부분에 참여했고 F1은 0.73로 26개 참여자 시스템 중 2위를 차지했다.', 'ca': 'Aquest article descriu BomJi, un sistema supervisat per capturar atributs discriminatoris en parelles de paraules (per exemple grocs com discriminatoris per a bananes sobre meló). El sistema es basa en un classificador XGB entrenat en característiques basades en gràfics, patrons i paraules. Va participar en el SemEval-2018 Task 10 on Capturint Discriminative Attributes, aconseguint una puntuació F1 de 0,73 i classificant la segona de cada 26 sistemes participants.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldatakse BomJi, järelevalvesüsteemi diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamiseks sõnapaarides (nt kollane diskrimineerib banaani arbuusi asemel). Süsteem tugineb XGB klassifikaatorile, mis on koolitatud hoolikalt projekteeritud graafikutel, mustritel ja sõnadel põhinevatel funktsioonidel. Ta osales SemEval-2018 ülesandes 10 diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamise kohta, saavutades F1 skoori 0,73 ja 26 osaleja süsteemist teise koha.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan BomJi, valvottu järjestelmä erottavien attribuuttien kuvaamiseen sanapareissa (esim. keltainen erotteleva banaani vesimelonin sijaan). Järjestelmä perustuu XGB-luokitukseen, joka on koulutettu huolellisesti suunniteltuihin graafi-, kuvio- ja sanaupotusominaisuuksiin. Se osallistui SemEval-2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes -tapahtumaan saavuttaen F1-pisteen 0,73 ja sijoittuen toiseksi 26 osallistujajärjestelmästä.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambarang BomJi, sistem sing wis ngawe nggawe atiribute sing dioksirampun (isih. Balisah kang dioksirampun kanggo singakake ban ning olèh dumateng). Sistem kang dipatengan XMB sing ditambang, ditambang panjenengan graf-, iso- lan kelangan sing basa batar. Rasane wis ngulinakake ing semiinval-2013 task 10 nang Capture Diskrim Attribute, nggawe F1 sing dumateng 0.75 lan singakake 2out sing 24 sistem sing wis berarti.', 'ha': 'Wannan karatun na describe BomJi, wani tsari ne mai tsaron ka kãma misalin abubuwa masu cikin kalma biyu (misali, bakwai kamar yin ɓarna wa banana a kan ruwa). @ action: button It participated in the SemEval-2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes, achieving an F1 score of 0.73 and ranking 2nd out of 26 participant systems.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את בום-ג\'י, מערכת מפקחת לתפוס תכונות דיסקרטיביים בזוגות מילים (למשל צהוב כדיסקרטיבי בננה מעל מלון). המערכת סומכת על קלאסיפור XGB מאומן על תכונות המבוססים בגרף, דפוס ומילים שנהנדסים בזהירות. הוא השתתף בתפקיד "SemEval-2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes", להשיג נקודת F1 של 0.73 והדרגות השנייה מתוך 26 מערכות משתתפות.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje BomJi, nadzorovan sistem za zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov v besednih parih (npr. rumena kot diskriminativna za banano nad lubenico). Sistem temelji na razvrščevalniku XGB, usposobljenem za skrbno zasnovane funkcije na podlagi grafičnih, vzorcev in besed. Sodelovala je v nalogi 10 SemEval-2018 o zajemanju diskriminativnih atributov, dosegla rezultat F1 0,73 in se uvrstila na drugo mesto od 26 udeleženih sistemov.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་BomJi་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚིག་གཉིས་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྗེས་འཆར་ཡོད། The system relies on an XGB classifier trained on carefully engineered graph-, pattern- and word embedding-based features. དེ་ནི་SemEval-2018 Task 10 on Capturing Discriminative Attributes, achieving F1 score of 0.73 and ranking 2 out of 26 participants systems.'}
{'en': 'Igevorse at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Exploring an Impact of Word Embeddings Concatenation for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'ar': 'Igevorse في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: استكشاف تأثير تسلسل تضمين الكلمة لالتقاط السمات التمييزية', 'pt': 'Igevorse no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Explorando um impacto da concatenação de Word Embeddings para capturar atributos discriminativos', 'es': 'Igevorse en SemEval-2018 Tarea 10: Explorando el impacto de la concatenación de incrustaciones de palabras para capturar atributos discriminativos', 'fr': "Igevorse à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 10\xa0: Explorer l'impact de la concaténation des intégrations de mots pour la capture d'attributs discriminants", 'ja': 'Igevorse at SemEval -2018 Task 10:差別的属性を取り込むためのWord埋め込みの連結の影響を探る', 'zh': 'Igevorse在SemEval-2018务10:探词嵌联', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर Igevorse: भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं पर कब्जा करने के लिए Word Embeddings Concatenation के प्रभाव की खोज', 'ru': 'Igevorse на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Изучение влияния объединения вложений слов для захвата дискриминационных атрибутов', 'ga': 'Igevorse ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Tionchar Leabaithe Focal a Iniúchadh Comhtheagasc chun Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil', 'ka': 'Igevorse at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Exploring an Impact of Word Embeddings Concatenation for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Εξερεύνηση των επιπτώσεων της αλληλοεπικάλυψης λέξεων για την καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών', 'hu': 'Igevorse at SemEval-2018 Task 10: A sz처be찼gyaz찼sok 철sszef체gg챕s챕nek felt찼r찼sa a diszkriminat챠v attrib첬tumok r철gz챠t챕s챕re', 'it': "Igevorse a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Esplorare l'impatto della concatenazione degli incorporamenti di parole per catturare attributi discriminatori", 'kk': 'Артивалдық 2018 тапсырмасы 10: Дискриминалды аттрибуттарды қабылдау үшін сөздерді ендіру нәтижесін зерттеу', 'lt': '10 užduotis: išnagrinėti žodžių įterpimo suderinimo poveikį siekiant sugauti diskriminacinius požymius', 'mk': 'Igevorse at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Exploring an Impact of Word Embeddings Concatenation for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'ms': 'Buat pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menjelaskan kesan penyelesaian Perkataan Kesatuan untuk Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif', 'mt': 'Igevor f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 10: L-esplorazzjoni ta’ impatt ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem Konċentrazzjoni għall-Qbid ta’ Attributi Diskriminattivi', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Шүүмжлэх үзүүлэлтийн нөлөө үзүүлэлтийг судлах', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10: വാക്കിന്റെ എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'Igevorse at semiEval-2018 oppgåve 10: Utforskar eit Impact of Word Embedding Concatenation for Capturing Discriminate Attributes', 'pl': 'Igevorse w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Badanie wpływu łączeń osadzeń słów na wychwytywanie atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych', 'ro': 'Igevorse la SemEval-2018 Task 10: Explorarea impactului concatenării încorporărilor Word pentru capturarea atributelor discriminatorii', 'sr': 'Igevorse na zadatku 10: istraživanje utjecaja uključenja reči', 'si': 'Igevarse at HalfEvel-2018 Job 10: Explorer an Impact of Word Embeading Concentration for Capturing discriminative Attibutes', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 10:', 'so': 'Isvorce at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Exploring an Impact of Word Embeds Concatenation for Capturing of Discriminative Attributes', 'sv': 'Igevorse på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Att undersöka effekterna av Word-inbäddningar för att fånga diskriminerande attribut', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10:', 'uz': 'Eval- 2018 Vazifani 10:', 'vi': 'Có động ở Nhiệm vụ SemEvol 10: Khám phá tác động của Chuột Ý về Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý Ý:', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Изследване на въздействието на вграждането на думи за улавяне на дискриминационни атрибути', 'hr': 'Igevorse na zadatku 10: istraživanje utjecaja uključenja riječi Zaključenje za uhićenje diskriminativnih atributa', 'da': 'Igevorse på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Undersøgelse af en virkning af Word Embeddings sammenhæng til at fange diskriminatoriske attributter', 'ko': 'SemEval-18에서 Igevorse의 작업 10: 단어 삽입 연결이 포획 구분 속성에 미치는 영향 탐색', 'nl': 'Igevorse op SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Onderzoek naar de impact van Word Embeddings Concatenation voor het vastleggen van discriminerende attributen', 'de': 'Igevorse at SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Untersuchung des Einflusses von Word Embeddings Verkettung auf die Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute', 'id': 'Terjadinya di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menjelaskan Impak Pencampuran Perkataan Kesempatan untuk Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif', 'fa': 'عملیات ۱۰: تحقیق اثر وارد شدن کلمات متصل برای گرفتن ویژه\u200cهای جدایی', 'sw': 'Ivory at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Kuelezea madhara ya Matukio ya Mazungumzo ya Neno kwa Kukamata Vitabu vya Ubaguzi', 'af': "Opdrag by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 10: Ondersoek 'n Impact van Woord Inbettings Konstansie vir ontvanging van diskriminate eienskappe", 'tr': 'Igevorse at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Exploring an Impact of Word Embeddings Concatenation for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'sq': 'Përdorimi në SemEval-2018 Detyra 10: Shqyrtimi i një ndikimi të përfshirjes së fjalëve Concatenation për kapjen e atributeve diskriminuese', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 10:', 'hy': 'Igevorse at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Exploring an Impact of Word Embeddings Concatenation for Capturing Discriminative Attributes', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কার্যক্রমের আইভোরেশন ১০: বৈষম্যিক বৈষম্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৈষম্যের ক্ষেত্রে শব্দ দূর্ঘটনার প্রভাব বিশ্লেষণ করছে', 'bs': 'Igevorse na zadatku 10: istraživanje utjecaja uključenja riječi', 'ca': "Ignorar en SemEval-2018 Task 10: Explorar un impacte d'incorporació de paraules Concatenation for Capturing Discriminative Attributes", 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: S칬zl칲k 캻fad톛si 캻fad톛sinin 캻fad톛sini 캻fad톛 Et', 'cs': 'Úkol 10: Zkoumání vlivu spojení slovních vložení na zachycení diskriminačních atributů', 'et': 'Igevorse SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 10: Sõnapõimimise mõju uurimine diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamiseks', 'fi': 'Igevorse SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Sanaupotusten vaikutuksen selvittäminen syrjivien attribuuttien kaappaamiseksi', 'jv': 'Ibevorsi at semi-2008 task 10: Expressing an Impoct of Word embedding concatenation for Capture Diskrim nate Attribute', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'Igevorse na SemEval-2018 naloga 10: Raziskovanje vpliva vključevanja besed za zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov', 'he': 'משימה 10: חקירת השפעה של משקפי מילים', 'bo': 'Igevorse at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Exploring an Impact of Word Embeddings Concatenation for Capturing Discriminative Attributes'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a comparison of several approaches for capturing discriminative attributes and considers an impact of concatenation of several word embeddings of different nature on the classification performance. A similarity-based method is proposed and compared with classical machine learning approaches. It is shown that this method outperforms others on all the considered word vector models and there is a performance increase when concatenated datasets are used.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une comparaison de plusieurs approches pour saisir les attributs discriminants et examine l'impact de la concaténation de plusieurs intégrations de mots de nature différente sur les performances de classification. Une méthode basée sur la similarité est proposée et comparée aux approches classiques d'apprentissage automatique. Il est démontré que cette méthode surpasse les autres sur tous les modèles vectoriels de mots considérés et que les performances augmentent lorsque des ensembles de données concaténés sont utilisés.", 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة مقارنة لعدة مناهج لالتقاط السمات التمييزية وتأخذ في الاعتبار تأثير تسلسل العديد من الكلمات المتضمنة ذات الطبيعة المختلفة على أداء التصنيف. تم اقتراح طريقة قائمة على التشابه ومقارنتها مع مناهج التعلم الآلي الكلاسيكية. يتضح أن هذه الطريقة تتفوق على الآخرين في جميع نماذج متجه الكلمات المدروسة وهناك زيادة في الأداء عند استخدام مجموعات البيانات المتسلسلة.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta uma comparação de várias abordagens para capturar atributos discriminativos e considera o impacto da concatenação de vários embeddings de palavras de natureza diferente no desempenho da classificação. Um método baseado em similaridade é proposto e comparado com abordagens clássicas de aprendizado de máquina. Mostra-se que este método supera outros em todos os modelos de vetores de palavras considerados e há um aumento de desempenho quando são usados conjuntos de dados concatenados.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta una comparación de varios enfoques para capturar atributos discriminativos y considera el impacto de la concatenación de varias incrustaciones de palabras de diferente naturaleza en el rendimiento de la clasificación. Se propone un método basado en similitudes y se compara con los enfoques clásicos de aprendizaje automático. Se demuestra que este método supera a otros en todos los modelos vectoriales de palabras considerados y hay un aumento en el rendimiento cuando se utilizan conjuntos de datos concatenados.', 'ja': 'この論文では、識別属性を取り込むためのいくつかのアプローチの比較を提示し、異なる性質のいくつかの単語埋め込みの連結が分類パフォーマンスに与える影響を考察した。類似性に基づく方法を提案し、古典的な機械学習アプローチと比較した。この方法は、考慮されたすべてのワードベクトルモデルで他のものよりも優れており、連結されたデータセットを使用するとパフォーマンスが向上することが示されている。', 'zh': '本文较了几种获判别的法术,并思量了几种性质的词词。 立一相似性之法,与经机器校之。 结果表明此法,于诸虑词向量皆优于他术,而以联数集时性为高。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए कई दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना प्रस्तुत करता है और वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन पर विभिन्न प्रकृति के कई शब्द एम्बेडिंग के संयोजन के प्रभाव पर विचार करता है। एक समानता-आधारित विधि प्रस्तावित की गई है और शास्त्रीय मशीन सीखने के दृष्टिकोण के साथ तुलना की जाती है। यह दिखाया गया है कि यह विधि सभी माने गए शब्द वेक्टर मॉडल पर दूसरों को मात देती है और जब कॉन्कटेनेटेड डेटासेट का उपयोग किया जाता है तो प्रदर्शन में वृद्धि होती है।', 'ru': 'В настоящей работе представлено сравнение нескольких подходов к улавливанию дискриминационных признаков и рассматривается влияние слияния нескольких вложений слов различного характера на эффективность классификации. Предложен метод, основанный на сходстве, который сравнивается с классическими подходами к машинному обучению. Показано, что этот метод превосходит другие на всех рассматриваемых моделях векторов слов, и при использовании объединенных наборов данных происходит увеличение производительности.', 'ga': 'Cuirtear i láthair sa pháipéar seo comparáid idir go leor cineálacha cur chuige chun tréithe idirdhealaitheacha a ghabháil agus breathnaítear ar an tionchar a imríonn leabú roinnt focal de chineál éagsúil ar an bhfeidhmíocht rangaithe. Moltar modh bunaithe ar chosúlachtaí agus cuirtear i gcomparáid é leis na cineálacha cur chuige clasaiceacha meaisínfhoghlama. Léirítear go n-éiríonn leis an modh seo níos fearr ná cinn eile ar na samhlacha veicteoirí focal a mheastar agus tá méadú ar fheidhmíocht nuair a úsáidtear tacair shonraí comhcheangailte.', 'ka': 'ეს დომენტი განსაზღვრებას რამდენიმე მიზეზების შესახებ დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების შესახებ და იფიქრობს რამდენიმე სიტყვების შესახებ განსხვავებული სიტყვების შესახებ კლასი სხვადასხვა მეტი მიღებულია და კლასიკური მანქანის სწავლების მიღებებით შედგენა. მოჩვენებულია, რომ ეს მეტი უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად გავაკეთებს ყველა მოდელში სიტყვების გვეკტორის მოდელში და როდესაც გამოყენებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია გამ', 'hu': 'A tanulmány több megkülönböztető tulajdonságok rögzítésére szolgáló megközelítés összehasonlítását mutatja be, és figyelembe veszi a különböző jellegű szóbeágyazások összefüggésének hatását az osztályozás teljesítményére. Hasonlóságon alapuló módszert javasolunk, és összehasonlítjuk a klasszikus gépi tanulási megközelítésekkel. Bemutatjuk, hogy ez a módszer az összes figyelembe vett szóvektoros modellben felülmúlja a többieket, és teljesítménynövekedést tapasztal az összekapcsolt adatkészletek használata esetén.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια σύγκριση διαφόρων προσεγγίσεων για την καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών και εξετάζει την επίδραση της αλληλουχίας πολλών ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων διαφορετικής φύσης στην απόδοση ταξινόμησης. Προτείνεται μια μέθοδος βασισμένη στην ομοιότητα και συγκρίνεται με τις κλασικές προσεγγίσεις μηχανικής μάθησης. Δείχνεται ότι αυτή η μέθοδος ξεπερνά τις άλλες σε όλα τα μελετημένα διανυσματικά μοντέλα λέξεων και υπάρχει αύξηση απόδοσης όταν χρησιμοποιούνται συμπληρωμένα σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un confronto di diversi approcci per catturare attributi discriminatori e considera l'impatto della concatenazione di più incorporazioni di parole di natura diversa sulle prestazioni di classificazione. Viene proposto un metodo basato sulla somiglianza e confrontato con gli approcci classici di machine learning. È dimostrato che questo metodo supera gli altri su tutti i modelli vettoriali di parole considerati e c'è un aumento delle prestazioni quando vengono utilizzati set di dati concatenati.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз дискриминациялық атрибуттарды алу үшін бірнеше арқылы салыстырып, бірнеше сөздерді салыстыру үшін бірнеше тәуелді табиғаттардың салыстыру нәтижесін көрсетеді. Классикалық машинаның оқыту жағдайларына салыстырылып, ұқсас тәртібі негізделген. Бұл әдіс сөз векторы үлгілерінде басқаларды өзгертеді деп көрсетіледі, және бағытталған деректер жинақтарын қолданғанда әрекеттерді өзгертеді.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува споредба на неколку пристапи за заземање дискриминативни атрибути и го разгледува влијанието на концентрација на неколку зборови од различна природа на класификациската перформанса. Предложен е метод базиран на сличност и спореден со класичните пристапи на машинско учење. Се покажува дека овој метод ги надминува другите на сите разгледувани векторни модели на зборови и дека постои зголемување на резултатите кога се користат концентрирани датотеки.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas kelių diskriminacinių požymių surinkimo metodų palyginimas ir nagrinėjamas kelių skirtingo pobūdžio žodžių įterpimo sutapimo poveikis klasifikavimo charakteristikoms. Siūlomas panašumo pagrindu grindžiamas metodas ir lyginamas su klasikiniais mašinų mokymosi metodais. Nurodoma, kad šis metodas yra didesnis už kitus visuose svarstomuose žodžių vektorių modeliuose ir, naudojant sutrumpintus duomenų rinkinius, rezultatai didėja.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan perbandingan beberapa pendekatan untuk menangkap atribut diskriminatif dan mempertimbangkan kesan penyesalan beberapa penyesalan perkataan sifat yang berbeza pada prestasi klasifikasi. Kaedah berdasarkan persamaan diusulkan dan dibandingkan dengan pendekatan pembelajaran mesin klasik. Ia dipaparkan bahawa kaedah ini melebihi yang lain pada semua model vektor perkataan yang dianggap dan terdapat peningkatan prestasi apabila set data yang bersamaan digunakan.', 'ml': 'This paper presents a comparison of several approaches for capturing discriminative attributes and considers an impact of concatenation of several word embeddings of different nature on the classification performance.  ഒരു സമമായ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d യന്ത്രം പഠിക്കുന്ന വഴികളോട് ത വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d മോഡലുകളില്\u200d മറ്റുള്ളവരെ ഈ രീതി', 'mt': 'This paper presents a comparison of several approaches for capturing discriminative attributes and considers an impact of concatenation of several word embeddings of different nature on the classification performance.  Metodu bbażat fuq similarità huwa propost u mqabbel ma’ approċċi klassiċi ta’ tagħlim bil-magni. Jidher li dan il-metodu jaqbeż il-prestazzjoni ta’ oħrajn fuq il-mudelli kollha kkunsidrati ta’ vetturi bil-kliem u hemm żieda fil-prestazzjoni meta jintużaw settijiet ta’ dejta konġuntati.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас ялгаагүй харилцааны тухай олон арга барилгыг харьцуулж, хэд хэдэн үгийг өөр өөр байгалийн байгалийн цогцолтын үр дүнг ойлгож үздэг. Үүний төстэй арга нь классик машины суралцах ойлголттой харьцуулсан. Энэ арга нь бусад хүмүүсийг тодорхой өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглах үед бүх үг вектор загвараас илүү үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono porównanie kilku podejść do przechwytywania atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych oraz rozważono wpływ łączenia kilku osadzeń słów o różnym charakterze na wydajność klasyfikacji. Zaproponowano metodę opartą na podobieństwie i porównano ją z klasycznymi metodami uczenia maszynowego. Pokazano, że metoda ta przewyższa inne na wszystkich rozważanych modelach wektorowych słowa i następuje wzrost wydajności, gdy używane są połączone zbiory danych.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o comparație a mai multor abordări pentru captarea atributelor discriminatorii și ia în considerare impactul concatenării mai multor încorporări de cuvinte de natură diferită asupra performanței clasificării. O metodă bazată pe similitudine este propusă și comparată cu abordările clasice de învățare automată. Se arată că această metodă depășește celelalte pe toate modelele vectoriale de cuvinte luate în considerare și există o creștere a performanței atunci când sunt utilizate seturi de date concatenate.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja usporedbu nekoliko pristupa za uhvatanje diskriminacijskih atributa i smatra utjecajem usklađenja nekoliko rečenih uloženja različitih priroda na klasifikaciju. Predložava se metod na temelju sličnosti i u usporedbi sa klasičnim pristupima učenja mašine. Pokazuje se da ovaj metod iznosi druge na svim smatraćim modelima rečenih vektora i da postoji povećanje učinka kada se koriste komponentni seti podataka.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ei samanlikning av fleire tilnærmingar for å henta diskriminasjonske attributt og ser på at ein effekt av samanlikning av fleire ord innebygging av ulike natur på klassifikasjonen er tilgjengeleg. Ein liknande metode er foreslått og samanlikna med klassiske maskinelæringstilnærmingar. Det vert vist at denne metoden utfører andre på alle det gjeld ordvektormodellen, og det finst eit utviklinga når samsvarande datasett vert bruka.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa tusaale ahaan looga dhigaa qaabilaad badan oo lagu qabsado tusaale ahaan takoorista, wuxuuna ka fikiraa saameyn ku yeelashada hadal kala duduwan oo ku saabsan sameynta fasaxa. Waxaa la soo jeedaa qaab isku mid ah oo la barbaran karo qalabka iskuulka. Waxaa la muujiyaa in qaababkan uu qof kale ka muujiyo qaababka qaababka loo fiiriyey oo dhan, waxaana jira kordhid sameynta sameynta marka lagu isticmaalo sawirada macluumaadka la qorayo.', 'si': 'This papers presents a comparison of a number of approach for catching discrdiscrdiscrinent Attempts and Considers an Impact of Concunitation of Severous Words Embdings of Differor Prize on the classification Perfection. සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය මෙෂින් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමඟ ප්\u200dර ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ මේ විධානය හැම වචන වෙක්ටර් මොඩල් වලට අනිත් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙයි කියලා, ඒ වගේම සම්බන්ධ විධ', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en jämförelse av flera tillvägagångssätt för att fånga diskriminerande attribut och undersöker hur sammankoppling av flera ord av olika karaktär påverkar klassificeringens prestanda. En liknande metod föreslås och jämförs med klassiska maskininlärningsmetoder. Det visas att den här metoden överträffar andra på alla betrodda ordvektormodeller och det finns en prestandaökning när sammanlänkade datauppsättningar används.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் வித்தியாசமான குணங்களை எடுத்துக் கொள்ள பல முறைகளை ஒப்பிடுக்கிறது மற்றும் வகுப்பு செயல்பாட்டில் பல வார்த்தைகள் பொருத ஒரு ஒற்றைப்படையான அடிப்படையிலான முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கப்படுகிறது மற்றும் சிறந்த இயந்திரத்தை கற்றல் முற It is shown that this method outperforms others on all the considered word vector models and there is a performance increase when concatenated datasets are used.', 'ur': 'This paper presents a comparison of several approaches for capturing discriminative attributes and considers an impact of concatenation of several words embedding of different nature on the classification performance. ایک برابری بنیادی طریقہ پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے اور کلاسیک ماشین سیکھنے کے قریبوں سے مقابلہ کی جاتی ہے. یہ طریقہ دکھائی جاتی ہے کہ یہ طریقہ تمام سمجھائے ہوئے لفظ ویکتور موڈل پر دوسروں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے اور جب سمجھائے ہوئے ڈاٹ سٹ استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں تو ایک فعالیت اضافہ ہوتی ہے.', 'uz': 'Бу саҳифа маълумот аъзоларини олиш учун бир гуруҳларнинг мисолларини кўрсатади ва маълумот тафсирлаш вазифасига турли сўзларни тўплаш учун ҳисобланади. Name Bu usul boshqa soʻz vektor modellarida ishlatiladi va bir xil maʼlumot setlari ishlatilganda ishlatiladi.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cho thấy một sự so sánh của nhiều phương pháp bắt giữ các thuộc tính phân biệt và xem xét tác động của việc kết hợp nhiều từ đính kèm khác nhau lên các hiệu quả phân loại. Một phương pháp tương đồng được đề xuất và so sánh với các phương pháp học máy cổ điển. Nó được hiển thị rằng phương pháp này vượt trội các loại khác trên tất cả các mô- đun định dạng từ được xem xét và có tăng suất khi các bộ dữ liệu được ký kết.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя сравнение на няколко подхода за улавяне на дискриминационни атрибути и разглежда въздействието на конкатенацията на няколко словни вграждания с различен характер върху класификационните показатели. Предлага се и се сравнява метод, основан на сходство с класическите подходи за машинно обучение. Показано е, че този метод превъзхожда другите при всички разглеждани модели вектори на думи и има увеличение на производителността при използване на конатенирани набори от данни.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een vergelijking van verschillende benaderingen voor het vastleggen van discriminatieve kenmerken en onderzoekt de impact van aaneenschakeling van verschillende woordembeddingen van verschillende aard op de classificatieprestaties. Een op overeenkomsten gebaseerde methode wordt voorgesteld en vergeleken met klassieke machine learning benaderingen. Er wordt aangetoond dat deze methode beter presteert dan andere op alle overwogen woordvectormodellen en er is een prestatieverhoging wanneer samengevoegde datasets worden gebruikt.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja usporedbu nekoliko pristupa za uhvaćenje diskriminacijskih atributa i smatra utjecajem zaključavanja nekoliko riječi uključenja različitih priroda na učinku klasifikacije. Predložava se metod na temelju sličnosti i u usporedbi s klasičnim pristupima učenja strojeva. Pokazuje se da ovaj metod iznosi druge na svim smatranim modelima riječi vektora i da se povećava učinkovitost kada se primjenjuju komponentni podaci.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en sammenligning af flere tilgange til at indfange diskriminerende egenskaber og overvejer en indvirkning af sammenkobling af flere ord af forskellig karakter på klassificeringens ydeevne. En lighedsbaseret metode foreslås og sammenlignes med klassiske maskinlæringsmetoder. Det er vist, at denne metode overgår andre på alle de betragtede ordvektormodeller, og der er en ydeevne stigning, når sammenkoblede datasæt bruges.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan perbandingan dari beberapa pendekatan untuk menangkap atribut diskriminatif dan mempertimbangkan dampak dari konsentrasi dari beberapa penyampilan kata dari alam yang berbeda pada prestasi klasifikasi. Metode berdasarkan persamaan diusulkan dan dibandingkan dengan pendekatan belajar mesin klasik. Ditunjukkan bahwa metode ini melebihi yang lain pada semua model vektor kata yang dianggap dan ada peningkatan prestasi ketika dataset konkatenasi digunakan.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt einen Vergleich verschiedener Ansätze zur Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute vor und untersucht den Einfluss der Verkettung mehrerer Worteinbettungen unterschiedlicher Art auf die Klassifikationsleistung. Es wird eine Ähnlichkeitsmethode vorgeschlagen und mit klassischen Machine Learning Ansätzen verglichen. Es wird gezeigt, dass diese Methode andere auf allen betrachteten Wortvektormodellen übertrifft und es eine Leistungssteigerung gibt, wenn verkettete Datensätze verwendet werden.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مقایسه از چندین روش برای گرفتن ویژه های جدا و جدا و تأثیر هماهنگی چندین کلمه در طبیعت متفاوت بر عملکرد گروه را نشان می دهد. یک روش بنیاد شبیه\u200cای پیشنهاد می\u200cشود و در مقایسه با نزدیک یادگیری ماشین کلاسیک می\u200cشود. نشان داده می\u200cشود که این روش دیگران را در تمام مدل\u200cهای ویکتور کلمه\u200cای که می\u200cپندارند انجام می\u200cدهد و هنگامی که مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متصل استفاده می\u200cشوند، افزایش عملکرد وجود دارد.', 'ko': '본고는 몇 가지 구분적 속성을 얻는 방법을 비교하고 몇 가지 서로 다른 성질의 단어가 삽입된 직렬이 분류 성능에 미치는 영향을 고려했다.싱크로율을 바탕으로 하는 학습 방법을 제시하고 고전적인 기계 학습 방법과 비교했다.그 결과 이 방법은 모든 고려된 어향량 모델에서 다른 방법보다 우수하고 직렬 데이터 집합을 사용할 때 성능이 향상된 것으로 나타났다.', 'sw': 'This paper presents a comparison of several approaches for capturing discriminative attributes and considers an impact of concatenation of several word embeddings of different nature on the classification performance.  Utawala unapendekezwa na unalinganishwa na mbinu za kujifunza kwa viwanda. Inaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii inaonyesha watu wengine kwenye mifano yote inayofikiriwa na neno na kuna ongezeko la utendaji pale seti za taarifa zinazotumiwa.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n vergelyking van verskeie toepassings vir diskriminasiewe eienskappe en beskou 'n effek van samelewing van verskeie woorde inbettings van verskillende natuur op die klasifikasie uitwerking. 'n Gelykheidsgebaseerde metode word voorgestel en vergelyk met klassieke masjien leer toegang. Dit is vertoon dat hierdie metode ander uitvoer op al die aangeroep woord vektor modelles en daar is 'n prestasie verhoog wanneer samelekteerde datastelle gebruik word.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz diskriminetik atributleri taýýarlamak üçin birnäçe golaýlaryň karlyştyrylygyny we klasifikasiýa etkinleşenlere birnäçe söz gabdalygynyň bir näçe söz gabdalygynyň täsir diýip pikir edýär. Birnäçe meňzeşlik taýýarlanan yöntem tassyklandyrylýar we klasik maşynyň öwrenmegi golaýlary bilen karşılaşdyrylýar. Bu yöntem başkalarını tüm düşünülen vektör modellerinden üstün tutar ve birleşmiş veri setleri kullanılanlarda etkinlik artması bar.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një krahasim të disa metodash për kapjen e atributeve diskriminuese dhe konsideron një ndikim të ndërprerjes së disa fjalëve të natyrës së ndryshme në performancën e klasifikimit. Një metodë bazuar në ngjashmëri propozohet dhe krahasohet me metodat klasike të mësimit të makinave. Shfaqet se ky metodë i kalon të tjerët në të gjitha modelet e vektorit të fjalëve të konsideruar dhe ekziston një rritje e performancës kur përdoren grupe të dhënash të shkurtra.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է տարբեր մոտեցումների համեմատությունը խտրականության առանձնահատկությունների նկատմամբ և համարում է տարբեր բնույթի բառերի համեմատության ազդեցությունը դասակարգման արդյունքի վրա: Նմանության հիմնված մեթոդ առաջարկում է և համեմատում է դասական մեքենայի ուսումնասիրության մոտեցումների հետ: Պարզվում է, որ այս մեթոդը ավելի շատ է արտադրում քան մյուսները բոլոր համարվում բառերի վեկտորների մոդելների վրա, և արդյունավետության աճ կա, երբ օգտագործվում են կոնկրետացված տվյալների համակարգեր:', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም በተለያዩ የሥርዓት አካባቢዎችን ለመያዝ እና በተለያዩ ቃላት በሥርዓት ግንኙነት ላይ የሚቆርጥ ጥያቄን ያስባል፡፡ በክላሲካል መሣሪያዎች ለመማር ግንኙነት ይታሰናበታል፡፡ ይህ ሥርዓት ሌሎችን በሚታሰቡት የቃላት vector model ሁሉ ላይ እንዲያሳያል እናም በተጠቃሚ ዳታዎችን በተጠቀም ጊዜ የድምፅ ፍጥረት ይጨመርበታል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt müxtəlif qüdrətləri almaq üçün bir neçə metodların qarşılaşdırmasını göstərir və klasifikasyon performansına müxtəlif təbiətlərin müxtəlif təbiətlərin müxtəlif təbiətlərinin müəyyənləşdirməsini düşünür. Similarlıq tabanlı metodu təbliğ edilir və klasik maşın öyrənməsi yaxınlıqları ilə qarşılaşdırılır. Bu metod başqalarını bütün hesab edilmiş söz vektoru modellərdə daha üstün etdiyini göstərilir və müəyyən edilmiş verilən qurğular istifadə edildikdə performans artırılır.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি বৈষম্যের বৈষম্য ধরার জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি পদক্ষেপ উপস্থাপন করেছে এবং বেশ কয়েকটি শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রকৃতির বিভিন্ন প্রকৃত একই ধরনের ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করা হয় এবং ক্লাসিক্যাল মেশিনের শিক্ষার উপায়ের সাথে তুলনা করা হয়। It is shown that this method outperforms others on all the considered word vector models and there is a performance increase when concatenated datasets are used.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja usporedbu nekoliko pristupa za uhvaćenje diskriminacijskih atributa i smatra utjecajem zaključavanja nekoliko riječi uključenja različitih priroda na učinku klasifikacije. Predlaže se metod na temelju sličnosti i u usporedbi s klasičnim pristupima učenja mašina. Pokazuje se da ovaj metod iznosi druge na svim smatranim modelima riječi vektora i da postoji povećanje učinkovitosti kada se koriste konačne datasete.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta una comparació de diversos enfocaments per capturar atributs discriminatoris i considera un impacte de concatenació de diverses integracions de paraules de natura diferent en el rendiment de la classificació. Es propone un mètode basat en la similitud i es compara amb els enfocaments clàssics d'aprenentatge automàtic. Es demostra que aquest mètode supera els altres en tots els models de paraules vectors considerats i hi ha un augment de rendiment quan s'utilitzen conjunts de dades concatenats.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje srovnání několika přístupů pro zachycení diskriminačních atributů a zvažuje vliv řetězců několika slovních vložení různé povahy na klasifikační výkonnost. Je navržena metoda založená na podobnosti a porovnána s klasickými přístupy strojového učení. Je ukázáno, že tato metoda předčí ostatní na všech uvažovaných vektorových modelech slova a při použití řetězovaných datových sad dochází ke zvýšení výkonu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse mitmete diskrimineerivate atribuutide kindlakstegemise lähenemisviiside võrdlus ja käsitletakse mitme erineva laadiga sõnade põimimise mõju klassifitseerimise tulemuslikkusele. Pakutakse välja sarnasusel põhinev meetod, mida võrreldakse klassikaliste masinõppe lähenemisviisidega. On näidatud, et see meetod ületab teisi kõigil kaalutletud sõnavaktormodellidel ja ühendatud andmekogumite kasutamisel suureneb jõudlus.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä vertaillaan useita lähestymistapoja syrjivien attribuuttien kuvaamiseen ja tarkastellaan useiden erilaisten sanaupotusten yhdistämisen vaikutusta luokituksen suorituskykyyn. Vastaavuuteen perustuvaa menetelmää ehdotetaan ja sitä verrataan klassisiin koneoppimiseen. On osoitettu, että tämä menetelmä on muita parempi kaikissa käsitellyissä sanavektorimalleissa ja että suorituskyky kasvaa, kun yhdistetyt aineistot käytetään.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki nggawe geraraning sampeyan karo akeh sampeyan kanggo nggawe atiribute ning Diskripatif lan ingkang sampeyan karo sampeyan sing wis ngawe barang sampeyan sak ngelarang kalite Perintah sing sabên nggambar sembar uwong nggawe karo bengalan karo pawarang kelas kuwi. Genjer-Genjer', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג שיוון של מספר גישות לתפוס תכונות דיסקרטיביות ושקול השפעה של שימוש של מספר מילים של טבע שונה על ביצועי ההקלטה. שיטה מבוססת על דמיון מוצעת ושוואה עם גישות לימוד מכונות קלאסיות. הוראה שהשיטה הזו מעליפה אחרים בכל דוגמני הוקטור המילים הנחשבים, ויש גיבוי ביצועים כאשר משתמשים במערכות נתונים משותפות.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena primerjava več pristopov za zajemanje diskriminacijskih atributov in obravnava vpliv združevanja več besednih vdelav različne narave na uspešnost klasifikacije. Predlagana je metoda, ki temelji na podobnosti in primerja s klasičnimi pristopi strojnega učenja. Pokazano je, da ta metoda presega druge pri vseh obravnavanih besednih vektorskih modelih, pri uporabi združenih naborov podatkov pa se zmogljivost poveča.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na gaya wani misãlai ga kãma wasu hanyõyi masu yin ɓarna kuma yana tunãni an yi wani matsayi mai haɗuwa da wasu kalmõmi da aka shigar da shi a kan fassarar-fassarar. An buƙata wata hanyor da ke daidaita a kan kwamfyuta, kuma a sami da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane. Ana nuna cewa, wannan metode yana samar da wasu kan duk misalin shiryoyin ayuka da aka yi bincike, kuma there za'a ƙara performance idan an yi amfani da daidaita danahan da aka ƙayyade.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྗེས་སུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཞིན་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞན་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་སྟངས་འདིས་དབྱིབས་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་མ་འད ལྟ་བུའི་ལམ་ལུགས་གཅིག་ལ་མཐུན་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་དང་མཐུན་རྙེད། ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་ཕན་ཚུན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་གཞན་པ་ཚོ་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་ཐུབ'}
{'en': 'AmritaNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Capturing discriminative attributes using convolution neural network over global vector representation.', 'ar': 'AmritaNLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: التقاط السمات التمييزية باستخدام الشبكة العصبية الالتفافية على تمثيل المتجه العالمي.', 'pt': 'AmritaNLP no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Capturando atributos discriminativos usando rede neural de convolução sobre representação vetorial global.', 'fr': "AmritanLP à SemEval-2018 Task 10\xa0: Capture d'attributs discriminants à l'aide d'un réseau de neurones à convolution sur une représentation vectorielle globale.", 'es': 'AmritanLP en la Tarea 10 de SemEval-2018: Captura de atributos discriminativos mediante la red neuronal de convolución sobre la representación vectorial global.', 'ja': 'AmritaNLP at SemEval -2018 Task 10 ：グローバルベクトル表現に対する畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用した識別属性のキャプチャ。', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 टास्क 10 में अमृताएनएलपी: वैश्विक वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व पर कनवल्शन न्यूरल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को कैप्चर करना।', 'zh': 'AmritaNLP在SemEval-2018务10:用卷积神经网络获全局矢量其判也。', 'ru': 'AmritaNLP на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Захват дискриминационных атрибутов с использованием сверточной нейронной сети над глобальным векторным представлением.', 'ga': 'AmritaNLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Tréithe idirdhealaitheacha a ghabháil ag baint úsáide as líonra néarúil convolution thar ionadaíocht veicteora domhanda.', 'ka': 'AmritaNLP SemEval-2018 Task 10: დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების შესახებ კონგულოციის ნეიროლური ქსელი გლობალური ვაკტორის გამოყენებაზე.', 'hu': 'AmritaNLP a SemEval-2018 feladat 10: diszkriminatív attribútumok rögzítése konvolúciós neurális hálózat segítségével globális vektorreprezentáción keresztül.', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών χρησιμοποιώντας νευρωνικό δίκτυο σύγχυσης πάνω από παγκόσμια διανυσματική αναπαράσταση.', 'it': 'AmritaNLP a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Catturare attributi discriminatori utilizzando la rete neurale di convoluzione sulla rappresentazione vettoriale globale.', 'kk': 'AmritaNLP 10. тапсырмасында: жалпы вектордың түсіндірілігіне арналған дискриминациялық атрибуттарды түсіндіру.', 'lt': '„AmritaNLP“ 10 užduotis „SemEval-2018“ 10: atrasti diskriminacinius požymius naudojant konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą, o ne visuotinį vektorių atstovavimą.', 'mk': 'AmritaNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing discriminative attributes using convolution neural network over global vector representation.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10: ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d വെക്റ്ററിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വിഭിന്നതയുടെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നു', 'mt': 'AmritaNLP f’SemEval-2018 Task 10: Qbid ta’ attributi diskriminatorji bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali ta’ konvoluzzjoni fuq rappreżentanza globali tal-vetturi.', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10-ийн AmritaNLP: Дэлхийн векторын төлөөлөлт дээр хуваалцах тархины сүлжээ ашиглан ялгаатай харилцаа барьж байна.', 'no': 'AmritaNLP på halvEval-2018 oppgåve 10: Hent diskriminasjonske attributt med konvolusjonsneuralnettverk over globale vektorrepresentasjon.', 'pl': 'AmritaNLP w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Przechwytywanie atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych za pomocą zwojowej sieci neuronowej na globalnej reprezentacji wektorowej.', 'ro': 'AmritaNLP la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii folosind rețeaua neurală de convoluție peste reprezentarea globală a vectorilor.', 'si': 'AmritNLP at Halfeval-2018 Job 10: Capture discrdiscrdiscrinent Attribes by use ConVoltion neural network over globe vettor presentation.', 'ms': 'AmritaNLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Menangkap atribut diskriminatif menggunakan rangkaian saraf konvolution atas perwakilan vektor global.', 'sr': 'AmritaNLP na zadatku 10 od semiEval-2018: prihvaćanje diskriminacijskih atributa koristeći konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu preko globalne predstave vektora.', 'ta': 'செம்Eval-2018 பணியில் அம்ரிடாNLP 10: குழப்பமான புதிய குணங்களை பிடித்துக் கொள்ளும் உலகளாவிய நெறியின் பகிர்ந்தத்திற்கு மேல் கூ', 'sv': 'AmritaNLP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Fånga diskriminerande attribut med hjälp av konvulutionsneuralt nätverk över global vektorrepresentation.', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2018 AmritaNLP 10: Qabsashada takoorida tusaale ahaan isticmaalka shabakadda neurada ee ku qoran wakiilka vectorka caalamiga ah.', 'ur': 'عمریتاNLP ٹاکس ۱۰ میں ہے: کلوب ویکتور نمایش کے ذریعے کانولیوشن نیورال نیٹ ورک کے مطابق مختلف اختلافات کا استعمال کرتا ہے.', 'vi': 'AmritaNchọc dò tại SemEvl-208 Task 10: chụp được các thuộc tính phân biệt bằng mạng thần kinh rối loạn kết nối qua đại diện vector.', 'uz': 'SemEval-2018 Vazifani 10:', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Заснемане на дискриминационни атрибути чрез конволюционна невронна мрежа над глобално векторно представяне.', 'da': 'AmritaNLP ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Optagelse af diskriminerende egenskaber ved hjælp af convolution neurale netværk over global vektorrepræsentation.', 'nl': 'AmritaNLP bij SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Het vastleggen van discriminatieve attributen met behulp van convolutie neuraal netwerk over wereldwijde vectorrepresentatie.', 'hr': 'AmritaNLP na zadatku 10. poluvola-2018: uhvaćenje diskriminacijskih atributa koristeći konvolucijsku neuralnu mrežu preko globalnog predstavljanja vektora.', 'ko': '2018년에 SEMANLLEVAL의 전역 신경 네트워크 특징 포획 임무 벡터를 사용했다.', 'id': 'AmritaNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing discriminative attributes using convolution neural network over global vector representation.', 'sw': 'AmritaNLP katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 10: Kukamata vifaa vya ubaguzi kwa kutumia mtandao wa neura wa kijeshi kwa uwakilishi wa vector duniani.', 'de': 'AmritaNLP bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute mithilfe von Faltungsneuronalen Netzen über globale Vektordarstellung.', 'af': 'AmritaNLP by SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Kies diskriminasiewe eienskappe met gebruik van konvolusie neuralnetwerk oor globale vektorvoorstelling.', 'tr': 'AmritaNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Diskriminetik atributleri küresel vektör temsilcisinde konvolution neural network kullanarak kaplamak.', 'am': 'ስራ 10:', 'fa': 'آمریتاNLP در تابع ۱۰ نیمه ۲۰۱۸: با استفاده از شبکه عصبی کنترل بر روی نمایش واکتور جهانی دستگیر کردن ویژگی\u200cهای جدایی.', 'az': 'AmritaNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Qlobal vektor representation over convolution neural network using discriminative attributes capturing.', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের আম্রিতাএনএলপি: বিশ্বব্যাপী ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মাধ্যমে কনফুল নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে বৈষম্', 'bs': 'AmritaNLP na zadatku 10. poluvola-2018: uhvatiti diskriminacijske atribute koristeći konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu preko globalne predstave vektora.', 'hy': 'Ամրիտա', 'et': 'AmritaNLP SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 10: Diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamine konvolutsioonivõrgu abil ülemaailmse vektori esituse üle.', 'ca': 'AmritaNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing discriminative attributes using convolution neural network over global vector representation.', 'cs': 'Úkol 10: Zachycení diskriminačních atributů pomocí konvoluční neuronové sítě přes globální vektorovou reprezentaci.', 'fi': 'AmritaNLP SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 10: Discriminatiivisten attribuuttien talteenotto konvoluationeuraaliverkon avulla globaalin vektoriedustuksen yli.', 'sq': 'AmritaNLP në SemEval-2018 Task 10: Kapja e atributeve diskriminuese duke përdorur rrjetin nervor konvolution mbi përfaqësimin global të vektorëve.', 'jv': 'paper size', 'he': 'AmritaNLP ב SemEval-2018 משימה 10: תפיסת תכונות דיסקרטיביים באמצעות רשת עצבית שינוי מעל מייצג ווקטורים גלובלי.', 'sk': 'AmritaNLP na SemEval-2018 naloga 10: Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov z uporabo konvolucijskega nevronskega omrežja prek globalne vektorske reprezentacije.', 'ha': "AmriyaNLP at SemEV-2018 Taimaikin 10: Ina kãma masu yin gawuya da ya yi amfani da jerin fanzu'in neural over wakin mataimaki ya global.", 'bo': 'AmritaNLP at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Capturing discriminative attributes using convolution neural network over global vector representation.'}
{'en': 'The Capturing Discriminative Attributes sharedtask is the tenth task, conjoint with SemEval2018. The task is to predict if a word can capture distinguishing attributes of one word from another. We use GloVe word embedding, pre-trained on openly sourced corpus for this task. A base representation is initially established over varied dimensions. These representations are evaluated based on validation scores over two models, first on an SVM based classifier and second on a one dimension CNN model. The scores are used to further develop the representation with vector combinations, by considering various distance measures. These measures correspond to offset vectors which are concatenated as features, mainly to improve upon the F1score, with the best accuracy. The features are then further tuned on the validation scores, to achieve highest F1score. Our evaluation narrowed down to two representations, classified on CNN models, having a total dimension length of 1204 & 1203 for the final submissions. Of the two, the latter feature representation delivered our best F1score of 0.658024 (as per result).', 'ar': 'المهمة المشتركة "التقاط السمات المميزة" هي المهمة العاشرة ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع SemEval2018. وتتمثل المهمة في التنبؤ بما إذا كانت الكلمة يمكنها التقاط السمات المميزة لكلمة ما عن أخرى. نحن نستخدم تضمين كلمة GloVe ، المدربين مسبقًا على مجموعة مصادر مفتوحة لهذه المهمة. يتم إنشاء التمثيل الأساسي في البداية على أبعاد متنوعة. يتم تقييم هذه التمثيلات بناءً على درجات التحقق من الصحة عبر نموذجين ، أولاً على مصنف قائم على SVM وثانيًا على نموذج CNN ذو البعد الواحد. تُستخدم الدرجات لزيادة تطوير التمثيل مع مجموعات المتجهات ، من خلال النظر في مقاييس المسافة المختلفة. تتوافق هذه التدابير مع متجهات الإزاحة التي يتم ربطها كميزات ، بشكل أساسي لتحسين درجة F1 ، بأفضل دقة. ثم يتم ضبط الميزات بشكل أكبر على درجات التحقق من الصحة ، لتحقيق أعلى درجة في F1. تم تضييق تقييمنا إلى تمثيلين ، مصنّفين على نماذج CNN ، بطول إجمالي يبلغ 1204 و 1203 للتقديمات النهائية. من بين الاثنين ، قدم تمثيل الميزة الأخير أفضل درجات F1 لدينا بقيمة 0.658024 (وفقًا للنتيجة).', 'es': 'La tarea compartida «Capturar atributos discriminativos» es la décima tarea, conjunta con SemEval2018. La tarea consiste en predecir si una palabra puede capturar los atributos distintivos de una palabra de otra. Utilizamos la incrustación de palabras GLOve, previamente entrenada en corpus de código abierto para esta tarea. Una representación base se establece inicialmente en dimensiones variadas. Estas representaciones se evalúan en función de las puntuaciones de validación en dos modelos, primero en un clasificador basado en SVM y segundo en un modelo CNN de una dimensión. Las puntuaciones se utilizan para desarrollar aún más la representación con combinaciones de vectores, considerando varias medidas de distancia. Estas medidas corresponden a vectores de desplazamiento que se concatenan como características, principalmente para mejorar la puntuación F1, con la mejor precisión. Luego, las funciones se ajustan aún más a las puntuaciones de validación para lograr la puntuación F1 más alta. Nuestra evaluación se redujo a dos representaciones, clasificadas en los modelos de CNN, con una longitud de dimensión total de 1204 y 1203 para las presentaciones finales. De las dos, la última representación de características obtuvo nuestro mejor puntaje de F1 de 0.658024 (según el resultado).', 'fr': "La tâche partagée «\xa0Capturer les attributs discriminants\xa0» est la dixième tâche, conjointe avec SemeVal2018. La tâche consiste à prédire si un mot peut saisir les attributs distinctifs d'un mot d'un autre. Pour cette tâche, nous utilisons l'intégration de mots Glove, pré-entraînée sur des corpus open source. Une représentation de base est initialement établie sur différentes dimensions. Ces représentations sont évaluées sur la base des scores de validation de deux modèles, d'abord sur un classificateur basé sur SVM et ensuite sur un modèle CNN à une dimension. Les scores sont utilisés pour développer davantage la représentation avec des combinaisons de vecteurs, en tenant compte de diverses mesures de distance. Ces mesures correspondent à des vecteurs de décalage qui sont concaténés en tant que caractéristiques, principalement pour améliorer le score F1, avec la meilleure précision. Les fonctionnalités sont ensuite affinées en fonction des scores de validation, afin d'obtenir le score F1 le plus élevé. Notre évaluation s'est limitée à deux représentations, classées sur des modèles CNN, ayant une longueur de dimension totale de 1204 et 1203 pour les soumissions finales. Parmi les deux, la dernière représentation des caractéristiques a fourni notre meilleur score F1 de 0,658024 (selon le résultat).", 'pt': 'A tarefa compartilhada “Capturando Atributos Discriminativos” é a décima tarefa, conjuntamente com SemEval2018. A tarefa é prever se uma palavra pode capturar atributos distintivos de uma palavra de outra. Usamos a incorporação de palavras GloVe, pré-treinadas em corpus de código aberto para esta tarefa. Uma representação base é inicialmente estabelecida sobre dimensões variadas. Essas representações são avaliadas com base em pontuações de validação em dois modelos, primeiro em um classificador baseado em SVM e segundo em um modelo CNN de uma dimensão. As pontuações são usadas para desenvolver ainda mais a representação com combinações de vetores, considerando várias medidas de distância. Essas medidas correspondem a vetores de offset que são concatenados como feições, principalmente para melhorar o F1score, com a melhor precisão. Os recursos são então ajustados nas pontuações de validação, para alcançar a pontuação F1 mais alta. Nossa avaliação se restringiu a duas representações, classificadas em modelos CNN, com um comprimento total de dimensão de 1204 e 1203 para as submissões finais. Dos dois, a última representação de recursos entregou nosso melhor F1score de 0,658024 (conforme resultado).', 'ja': '「差別的属性のキャプチャ」共有タスクは、SemEval 2018と連携した10番目のタスクです。 タスクは、単語がある単語と別の単語の区別する属性をキャプチャできるかどうかを予測することです。 このタスクでは、オープンソースのコーパスで事前にトレーニングされたGloVeワード埋め込みを使用します。 基底表現は、最初に多様な次元にわたって確立される。 これらの表現は、２つのモデルにわたる検証スコアに基づいて評価され、まず、ＳＶＭベースの分類子に基づいており、次に、１次元ＣＮＮモデルに基づいている。 スコアは、様々な距離測定値を考慮することによって、ベクトルの組み合わせで表現をさらに発展させるために使用される。 これらの尺度は、主に最良の精度でＦ１スコアを改善するために特徴として連結されるオフセットベクトルに対応する。 次いで、特徴を検証スコアにさらに調整して、最高のＦ１スコアを達成する。 当社の評価は、CNNモデルで分類された2つの表現に絞り込まれ、最終提出物の総寸法長は1204 &amp; 1203です。 ２つのうち、後者の特徴表現は、（結果として） ０ ． ６ ５ ８ ０ ２ ４の最高のＦ １スコアを提供した。', 'zh': '"获判属性",十也,与SemEval2018合用。 任占一单词可得一单词与一单词异性也。 用 GloVe 词嵌,预练于开源语料库。 盖初立於维度也。 二验分数,一 SVM 分器,二一维 CNN 模形。 分以度之值来益以矢量合也。 凡此诸偏移矢量,以至精易 F1score。 然后验分数而调之,以致至F1评分。 吾评缩两表,CNN模形分,终总维度长为12041203。 此二者,后之所以为上F1score 0.658024()。', 'hi': '"भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं पर कब्जा करना" sharedtask दसवां कार्य है, जो SemEval2018 के साथ जुड़ा हुआ है। कार्य यह अनुमान लगाना है कि क्या कोई शब्द एक शब्द की विशिष्ट विशेषताओं को दूसरे से कैप्चर कर सकता है। हम GloVe शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं, इस कार्य के लिए खुले तौर पर सोर्स किए गए कॉर्पस पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित। एक आधार प्रतिनिधित्व शुरू में विभिन्न आयामों पर स्थापित किया जाता है। इन अभ्यावेदनों का मूल्यांकन दो मॉडलों पर सत्यापन स्कोर के आधार पर किया जाता है, पहला एसवीएम आधारित क्लासिफायर पर और दूसरा एक आयाम सीएनएन मॉडल पर। स्कोर का उपयोग विभिन्न दूरी उपायों पर विचार करके वेक्टर संयोजनों के साथ प्रतिनिधित्व को और विकसित करने के लिए किया जाता है। ये उपाय ऑफसेट वैक्टर के अनुरूप हैं जो सुविधाओं के रूप में संयोजित होते हैं, मुख्य रूप से F1score पर सुधार करने के लिए, सर्वोत्तम सटीकता के साथ। सुविधाओं को फिर सत्यापन स्कोर पर ट्यून किया जाता है, उच्चतम F1score प्राप्त करने के लिए। हमारा मूल्यांकन दो अभ्यावेदनों तक सीमित हो गया, सीएनएन मॉडल पर वर्गीकृत किया गया, जिसमें अंतिम प्रस्तुतियों के लिए 1204 और 1203 की कुल आयाम लंबाई थी। दोनों में से, बाद की सुविधा प्रतिनिधित्व ने 0.658024 (परिणामस्वरूप) का हमारा सबसे अच्छा F1score वितरित किया।', 'ru': 'Общая задача «Захват дискриминационных атрибутов» является десятой задачей, связанной с SemEval2018. Задача состоит в том, чтобы предсказать, может ли слово фиксировать отличительные признаки одного слова от другого. Для этой задачи мы используем встраивание слов GloVe, предварительно обученные на корпусе с открытым источником. Базовое представление изначально устанавливается в различных размерах. Эти представления оцениваются на основе оценок валидации по двум моделям, во-первых, на основе классификатора на основе виртуальной машины защиты и, во-вторых, на основе одномерной модели CNN. Баллы используются для дальнейшего развития представления с векторными комбинациями, учитывая различные измерения расстояния. Эти показатели соответствуют векторам смещения, которые объединены как признаки, в основном для улучшения по шкале F1 с наилучшей точностью. Затем характеристики дополнительно настраиваются на валидационные баллы, чтобы достичь наивысшего балла F1. Наша оценка сузилась до двух представлений, классифицированных по моделям CNN, имеющих общую длину размеров 1204 и 1203 для окончательных представлений. Из двух, последняя характеристика показала наш лучший F1-балл 0,658024 (по результатам).', 'ga': 'Is é an tasc comhroinnte “Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil” an deichiú tasc, i gcomhar le SemEval2018. Is é an tasc a thuar an féidir le focal tréithe idirdhealaitheacha focal amháin agus focal eile a ghabháil. Bainimid úsáid as leabú focal GloVe, réamh-oilte ar chorpas foinse oscailte don tasc seo. Bunaítear bunionadaíocht thar toisí éagsúla ar dtús. Déantar na huiríll seo a mheas bunaithe ar scóir bailíochtaithe thar dhá mhúnla, ar dtús ar aicmitheoir bunaithe ar SVM agus sa dara háit ar mhúnla CNN aontoise. Úsáidtear na scóir chun tuilleadh forbartha a dhéanamh ar an léiriú le teaglaim veicteoirí, trí thomhais éagsúla faid a bhreithniú. Freagraíonn na bearta seo do veicteoirí fritháirimh a chomhtháthaítear mar ghnéithe, go príomha chun feabhas a chur ar an scór F1, leis an gcruinneas is fearr. Déantar na gnéithe a choigeartú níos mó ansin ar na scóir bhailíochtaithe, chun an scór F1 is airde a bhaint amach. Laghdaigh ár meastóireacht síos go dtí dhá léiriú, rangaithe ar mhúnlaí CNN, le fad toise iomlán de 1204 & 1203 do na haighneachtaí deiridh. As an dá cheann, sheachaid an léiriú gné deiridh ár scór F1 is fearr de 0.658024 (de réir an toraidh).', 'hu': 'A "Megkülönböztető attribútumok rögzítése" megosztott feladat a tizedik feladat, a SemEval2018-mal együtt. A feladat annak megjósolása, hogy egy szó képes-e megkülönböztetni az egyik szó attribútumait a másiktól. GloVe szóbeágyazást használunk, amelyet előre képzettek a nyílt forrásból származó corpusra ehhez a feladathoz. Az alap ábrázolását kezdetben különböző dimenziókban hozzák létre. Ezeket a reprezentációkat két modell validációs pontszáma alapján értékeljük, először egy SVM alapú osztályozó, második pedig egydimenziós CNN modell alapján. A pontszámokat a vektorkombinációkkal történő ábrázolás továbbfejlesztésére használjuk, különböző távolságmérések figyelembevételével. Ezek a mérések megfelelnek az offset vektoroknak, amelyek jellemzőkként összekapcsolódnak, elsősorban az F1pontszám javítása érdekében, a legjobb pontossággal. A funkciókat ezután tovább hangoljuk az érvényesítési pontszámokra, hogy elérjük a legmagasabb F1pontszámot. Értékelésünk két CNN modellekre osztályozott ábrázolásra szűkült, amelyek teljes mérethossza 1204 és 1203 volt a végső beadványok esetében. A kettő közül az utóbbi funkció ábrázolása a legjobb F1pontszámunkat, 0,658024 (eredményenként).', 'el': 'Η κοινή εργασία "Καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών" είναι η δέκατη εργασία, σε συνδυασμό με το SemEval2018. Το καθήκον είναι να προβλεφθεί αν μια λέξη μπορεί να συλλάβει διακριτικά χαρακτηριστικά μιας λέξης από μια άλλη. Χρησιμοποιούμε την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, προεκπαίδευση σε ανοιχτό σώμα για αυτό το έργο. Μια βασική αναπαράσταση δημιουργείται αρχικά σε ποικίλες διαστάσεις. Αυτές οι αναπαραστάσεις αξιολογούνται με βάση τις βαθμολογίες επικύρωσης σε δύο μοντέλα, πρώτον σε έναν ταξινομητή βασισμένο σε SVM και δεύτερον σε ένα μοντέλο μιας διάστασης. Οι βαθμολογίες χρησιμοποιούνται για την περαιτέρω ανάπτυξη της αναπαράστασης με διανυσματικούς συνδυασμούς, λαμβάνοντας υπόψη διάφορα μέτρα απόστασης. Τα μέτρα αυτά αντιστοιχούν σε διανύσματα μετατόπισης τα οποία αλληλοσυνδέονται ως χαρακτηριστικά, κυρίως για τη βελτίωση της βαθμολογίας F1, με την καλύτερη ακρίβεια. Στη συνέχεια, τα χαρακτηριστικά συντονίζονται περαιτέρω στις βαθμολογίες επικύρωσης, για να επιτευχθεί η υψηλότερη βαθμολογία F1. Η αξιολόγησή μας περιορίστηκε σε δύο αναπαραστάσεις, ταξινομημένες σε μοντέλα με συνολικό μήκος διάστασης 1204.1203 για τις τελικές υποβολές. Από τα δύο, η τελευταία απεικόνιση χαρακτηριστικών έδωσε την καλύτερη βαθμολογία μας 0.658024 (σύμφωνα με το αποτέλεσμα).', 'kk': '"Дискриминалды аттрибуттарды түсіру" бөлімі - оның 10 тапсырмасы, SemEval2018- мен біріктірілген. Тапсырма - сөз бір сөздің атрибуттарын басқа сөзден айырмалау мүмкіндігін алуы мүмкіндігін көрсету. Бұл тапсырма үшін Glove сөздерді ендіру, ашық көзгертілген корпус арқылы оқылған. Төменгі түрлі өлшемдерден бастапқы негізгі келтірімі орнатылады. Бұл кескіндер екі үлгі арқылы тексеру нәтижелеріне негізделген, біріншіден SVM негізделген классификаторына және екіншіден CNN үлгісіне негізделген тексеру нәтижелеріне негізделген. Нәтижелер бірнеше қашықтық өлшемдерді есептеу үшін вектор комбинацияларының түрінде көрсетілетін болады. Бұл мерзімдері өзгертілген векторларға сәйкес келеді, негізінде F1- нүктесіне жақсарту үшін, ең дұрыстығымен. Бұл мүмкіндіктерді тексеру нәтижесінде, ең жоғары F1 нәтижесін жеткізу үшін қосылады. Біздің бағалауымыз CNN үлгілеріне сәйкес келтірілген екі келтірімдерге көбейтіп, соңғы жіберу үшін 1204 & 1203 өлшемінің жалпы ұзындығы бар. Екіншіден, соңғы мүмкіндіктердің таңдауы біздің ең жақсы F1- нәтижесімізді 0, 658024 (нәтижесімізде).', 'it': 'Il compito condiviso "Catturare attributi discriminatori" è il decimo compito, congiunto con SemEval2018. Il compito è quello di prevedere se una parola può catturare attributi distintivi di una parola dall\'altra. Usiamo GloVe word embedding, pre-addestrato su corpus open source per questo compito. Una rappresentazione di base è inizialmente stabilita su varie dimensioni. Queste rappresentazioni sono valutate sulla base dei punteggi di convalida su due modelli, primo su un classificatore basato su SVM e secondo su un modello CNN a una dimensione. I punteggi vengono utilizzati per sviluppare ulteriormente la rappresentazione con combinazioni vettoriali, considerando varie misure di distanza. Queste misure corrispondono a vettori offset concatenati come caratteristiche, principalmente per migliorare il punteggio F1score, con la migliore precisione. Le caratteristiche vengono poi ulteriormente sintonizzate sui punteggi di convalida, per ottenere il punteggio F1score più alto. La nostra valutazione si è ridotta a due rappresentazioni, classificate su modelli CNN, con una lunghezza totale di 1204 e 1203 per le presentazioni finali. Dei due, quest\'ultima rappresentazione ha fornito il nostro miglior punteggio F1score di 0,658024 (come da risultato).', 'lt': "The 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' sharedtask is the tenth task, conjoint with SemEval2018.  Įsipareigojimas yra nuspėti, ar žodis gali atspindėti skirtingus vieno žodžio požymius nuo kito. Šioms užduotims naudojame GloVe žodžių įdėjimą, iš anksto apmokytus atvirai išgautą korpusą. Iš pradžių nustatomas įvairių matmenų pagrindas. Šie rodikliai vertinami remiantis dviejų modelių patvirtinimo rezultatais, pirmiausia SVM grindžiamu klasifikatoriumi ir antra vieno matmens CNN modeliu. The scores are used to further develop the representation with vector combinations, by considering various distance measures.  Šios priemonės atitinka kompensacinius vektorius, kurie yra sutrumpinti kaip charakteristikos, daugiausia siekiant geriausiai tiksliai pagerinti F1 tašką. Tada savybės toliau pritaikomos prie patvirtinimo rezultatų, kad būtų pasiektas aukščiausias F1 rezultatas. Mūsų vertinimas sutrumpėjo iki dviejų CNN modeliuose klasifikuotų nuorodų, kurių bendras matmens ilgis galutiniams pareiškimams buvo 1204 ir 1203. Iš šių dviejų, pastarojo rodiklio atstovavimas pasiekė geriausią F1 tašką – 0,658024 (pagal rezultatą).", 'ms': 'task is the tenth task, conjoint with SemEval2018. Tugas adalah untuk meramalkan jika perkataan boleh menangkap atribut yang membezakan satu perkataan dari yang lain. Kita gunakan perkataan GloVe, dilatih pada korpus yang terbuka untuk tugas ini. Perwakilan asas awalnya ditetapkan atas dimensi berbeza. Perwakilan ini diteliti berdasarkan skor pengesahihan atas dua model, pertama pada pengelasah berdasarkan SVM dan kedua pada model CNN satu dimensi. Skor digunakan untuk mengembangkan perkembangan lebih lanjut dengan kombinasi vektor, dengan mempertimbangkan berbeza ukuran jarak. Ukuran ini sepadan dengan vektor ofset yang dikumpatikan sebagai ciri-ciri, terutamanya untuk meningkatkan pada skor F1, dengan ketepatan terbaik. Ciri-ciri kemudian ditetapkan lebih lanjut pada skor pengesahihan, untuk mencapai skor F1tertinggi. Evaluasi kami dikurangkan kepada dua perwakilan, diklasifikasikan pada model CNN, mempunyai panjang dimensi total 1204 & 1203 untuk penghantaran akhir. Of the two, the latter feature representation delivered our best F1score of 0.658024 (as per result).', 'mk': 'Соделената задача „Фаќање дискриминативни атрибути“ е десеттата задача, заедно со SemEval2018. Задачата е да се предвиде дали зборот може да ги фати разликувачките атрибути на еден збор од друг. За оваа задача користиме Глов збор, претрениран на отворен корпус. A base representation is initially established over varied dimensions.  These representations are evaluated based on validation scores over two models, first on an SVM based classifier and second on a one dimension CNN model.  Резултатите се користат за понатамошен развој на претставувањето со комбинациите со вектори, со разгледување на различни мерки на растојание. Овие мерки се совпаѓаат со окупциски вектори кои се концентрирани како карактеристики, главно за подобрување на резултатот F1score, со најдобра прецизност. Потоа карактеристиките се понатаму прилагодени на резултатите за валидација, за да се постигне највисокиот резултат F1score. Нашата оценка се намали на две претставувања, класификувани на модели на СНН, со вкупна димензионална должина од 1204 и 1203 за конечните поднесувања. Од двајцата, последната претстава на карактеристиката ни даде најдобра оценка F1од 0,658024 (по резултат).', 'ka': "'დისკრიმინატური ატრიბუტები' გაყოფილი ატრიბუტები არის ახსენი დავალება, რომელიც SemEval2018-ს დაკავშირებულია. დავალება არის გადაწყვეტა თუ სიტყვის შეუძლიათ ერთი სიტყვის ატრიბუტების განსხვავებას. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ Glove სიტყვას, საუკეთესოდ განვიყენებული კორპუსს ამ დავალებისთვის. ბაზის გამოსახულება განსხვავებული განზომილებების შესახებ დაწყებულია. ამ გამოსახულებების განსაზღვრებულება ორი მოდელის განსაზღვრებულებაზე გამოყენებულია, პირველი SVM-ის განსაზღვრებული კლასიფიკაციაზე და მეორე CNN მოდელის განსაზღვრებულებაზე. მონიშვნები გამოყენება განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული მონაცემებით განსხვავებული განსხვავებული მონაცემებით გამოყენება. ეს მოზემილებები კონფიგურაცია გვექტორებისთვის, რომლებიც განსხვავებულია როგორც განსხვავებულია, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია F1score-ის განსხვავებას, უფრო მნი შემდეგ უფრო მარტივი F1score დაიწყება განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესახებ. ჩვენი განსაზღვრება ორი განსაზღვრებულებებისთვის, რომლებიც CNN მოდელში კლასიფიცირებულია, რომლებიც ბოლო განსაზღვრებული სიგრძე 1204 & 1203-ის განსაზღვრებულია. ორიდან, შემდეგი განსაზღვრება ჩვენი საუკეთესო F1score 0.658024-ის (შემდეგ).", 'mt': 'Il-kompitu kondiviż tal-“Qbid ta’ Attributi Diskriminattivi” huwa l-għaxar kompitu, konġunt mas-SemEval2018. Il-kompitu huwa li wieħed jipprevedi jekk kelma tistax taqbad attributi li jiddistingwu kelma minn kelma oħra. Aħna nużaw l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kelma GloVe, imħarrġa minn qabel fuq korpus ta’ sors miftuħ għal dan il-kompitu. Inizjalment tiġi stabbilita rappreżentanza bażi fuq dimensjonijiet varjati. Dawn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet huma evalwati abbażi ta’ punteġġi ta’ validazzjoni fuq żewġ mudelli, l-ewwel fuq klassifikatur ibbażat fuq SVM u t-tieni fuq mudell CNN b’dimensjoni waħda. Il-punteġġi jintużaw biex tiġi żviluppata aktar ir-rappreżentanza b’kombinazzjonijiet ta’ vetturi, billi jiġu kkunsidrati diversi miżuri ta’ distanza. Dawn il-miżuri jikkorrispondu ma’ vetturi ta’ kumpens li huma kkonċentrati bħala karatteristiċi, prinċipalment biex itejbu fuq il-punteġġ F1, bl-aħjar preċiżjoni. Il-karatteristiċi mbagħad jiġu aġġustati aktar fuq il-punteġġi tal-validazzjoni, biex jinkiseb l-ogħla punteġġ F1score. L-evalwazzjoni tagħna naqset għal żewġ rappreżentazzjonijiet, ikklassifikati fuq mudelli CNN, li kellhom tul totali ta’ dimensjoni ta’ 1204 u 1203 għas-sottomissjonijiet finali. Mit-tnejn, ir-rappreżentazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi tal-aħħar wasslet għall-aħjar punteġġ F1 tagħna ta’ 0.658024 (skont ir-riżultat).', 'mn': '"Шүүмжлэх үйлдвэрлэл" хэлэхдээ 10 дахь ажил нь SemEval2018-тай холбогдож байна. Тайлбар бол нэг үг өөрөөсөө нэг үгийн өөрчлөлтүүдийг авах эсэхийг тодорхойлж чадна. Бид Glove үг үүнийг ашиглаж, нээлттэй хөрөнгө оруулсан корпус ашиглаж байна. Эхлээд суурь загвар нь өөр хэмжээсүүд дээр байгуулагддаг. Эдгээр илтгэлүүд нь хоёр загвараас илүү дүгнэлттэй үндсэн, анхны SVM-д суурилсан классификатор дээр, хоёрдугаар нэг хэмжээст CNN загвар дээр дүгнэлттэй байдаг. Тоогууд нь олон зай хэмжээсүүдийг ойлгохын тулд вектор холбоотой илэрхийлэл хөгжүүлэхэд хэрэглэгддэг. Эдгээр хэмжээсүүд нь тодорхойлогдсон оффет векторуудтай холбогддог, ихэвчлэн F1 оноо дээр сайн тодорхойлогддог. Хамгийн өндөр F1score хүртэл шийдвэрлэх тоонуудыг дахин дахин тодорхойлдог. Бидний оюутнууд CNN загвараар хуваагдсан хоёр илэрхийллийг багасгасан. Эцэст нь 1204 & 1203 хэмжээст урттай. Хоёр дахь нь, хамгийн сайн F1score нь 0.658024 (үр дүн тутамд).', 'pl': 'Udostępnione zadanie "Przechwytywanie dyskryminacyjnych atrybutów" jest dziesiątym zadaniem, połączonym z SemEval2018. Zadaniem jest przewidzieć, czy słowo może uchwycić cechy odróżniające jednego słowa od drugiego. Do tego zadania używamy wbudowania słów GloVe, wstępnie przeszkolonego na otwartym korpusie. Podstawowa reprezentacja jest początkowo ustalana w różnych wymiarach. Reprezentacje te są oceniane na podstawie wyników walidacji w dwóch modelach, najpierw na klasyfikatorze opartym na SVM, a drugie na jednowymiarowym modelu CNN. Wyniki są wykorzystywane do dalszego rozwijania reprezentacji za pomocą kombinacji wektorów, uwzględniając różne miary odległości. Miary te odpowiadają wektorom przesuniętym, które są łączone jako cechy, głównie w celu poprawy wyniku F1, z najlepszą dokładnością. Funkcje są następnie dalej dostrojone do wyników walidacji, aby osiągnąć najwyższy wynik F1. Nasza ocena zawęziła się do dwóch reprezentacji, sklasyfikowanych na modelach CNN, o całkowitej długości wymiarowej 1204,1203 dla ostatecznych zgłoszeń. Spośród tych dwóch, ta ostatnia reprezentacja cech zapewniła nasz najlepszy wynik F1 0.658024 (według wyniku).', 'ro': 'Sarcina partajată "Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii" este a zecea sarcină, împreună cu SemEval2018. Sarcina este de a prezice dacă un cuvânt poate capta atributele distinctive ale unui cuvânt de altul. Pentru această sarcină folosim încorporarea cuvintelor GloVe, pregătiți în prealabil pe corpuri deschise. O reprezentare de bază este stabilită inițial pe dimensiuni variate. Aceste reprezentări sunt evaluate pe baza scorurilor de validare pe două modele, primul pe un clasificator bazat pe SVM și al doilea pe un model CNN cu o singură dimensiune. Scorurile sunt folosite pentru a dezvolta în continuare reprezentarea cu combinații vectoriale, luând în considerare diferite măsuri de distanță. Aceste măsuri corespund vectorilor offset care sunt concatenați ca caracteristici, în principal pentru a îmbunătăți punctajul F1scor, cu cea mai bună precizie. Caracteristicile sunt apoi reglate în continuare pe scorurile de validare, pentru a obține cel mai mare scor F1scor. Evaluarea noastră s-a redus la două reprezentări, clasificate pe modele CNN, având o lungime totală de dimensiuni de 1204 și 1203 pentru depunerile finale. Dintre cele două reprezentări, ultima caracteristică a oferit cel mai bun scor F1de 0,658024 (ca pe rezultat).', 'sr': '"Uhvatanje diskriminativnih atributa" podijeljeno pitanje je deseti zadatak, povezan sa SemEval2018. Taj zadatak je predviđati da li reč može uhvatiti različite atribute jedne reči od druge. Koristimo Glove reč uključenu, predobučenu na otvorenom korpusu za ovaj zadatak. Predstava baze je u početku uspostavljena preko različitih dimenzija. Ove predstave se procjenjuju na temelju rezultata validacije preko dva model a, prvo na klasifikatoru baziranom na SVM-u i drugo na jednoj dimenziji CNN modela. Rezultati se koriste za daljnje razvijanje zastupanja sa kombinacijom vektora s obzirom na različite mjere udaljenosti. Ove mjere odgovaraju premještajnim vektorima koji su potvrđeni kao karakteristike, uglavnom da bi poboljšali F1score, sa najboljom preciznošću. Osobine su onda dalje uključene na rezultate validacije, kako bi postigli najviši F1score. Naša procjena je sužana na dve zastupe, klasifikovane na CNN modelima, imajući ukupnu dužinu dimenzije 1204 i 1203 za konačne isporuke. Od dvoje, poslednja predstava naših najboljih F1rezultata od 0,658024 (kao rezultat).', 'ml': "'ക്യാപ്റ്റീമിന്റീവ് ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d' പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് പത്താമത്തെ ജോലിയാണ്, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d2018യോടൊപ്പം. ഒരു വാക്ക് മറ്റൊരു വാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച് വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിശേഷതകള്\u200d പിടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഗ്ലോവി വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ഈ ജോലിക്ക് വേണ്ടി പ്രത്യേക പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലനം  വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മേല്\u200d ഒരു ബേസ് പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d ആദ്യം സ്ഥാപിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d രണ്ടു മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് മേല്\u200d വില്ലാത്ത സ്കോര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലാണ്, ആദ്യം ഒരു SVM അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d എന്നിട്ട വെക്റ്റര്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട് പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയെ കൂടുതല്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്ക പ്രാധാന്യം F1സ്കോര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d ഈ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് സമ്മതിക്കുന്നു. ഏറ്റവും നല്ല വിശേ The features are then further tuned on the validation scores, to achieve highest F1score.  നമ്മുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് കുറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്നു. സിഎന്\u200d എന്\u200d മോഡലില്\u200d വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം കീഴടങ രണ്ടുപേരില്\u200d, അവസാന പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച F1 സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 658024 (അതിന്റെ ഫലമായി).", 'si': "'විශේෂ විශේෂ ගැනීම' කිරීමේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය' කියලා බලාපොරොත්තු ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය දහසම වැඩය තමයි වචනයක් වෙනස් වචනයෙන් වෙනස් වචනයෙන් වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන්ද කියලා හිතන්න. අපි Glove වචනය පාවිච්චි කරනවා මේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙනවා. මූල ප්\u200dරතිරූපයක් පටන්ගත වෙනස් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂයෙන් ස්ථාපිත වෙනවා. මේ ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණාවන් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ මොඩේල් දෙකක් වඩා විශ්වාස කරනවා, මුලින්ම SVM අධාරිත විශ්වාස කරනවා සහ දෙ වෙක්ටර් සම්බන්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, විවිධ දුරස්ථානය සැකස මේ මාර්ගයක් අෆ්සෙට් වෙක්ටර්ස් වලට සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා මේ වෙක්ටර්ස් වලට සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා, මුලින්ම F1score වලට ප්\u200dරශ පස්සේ විශේෂතාවල් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශ්වාස කරන්න, F1score විශේෂතාවක් ලැබෙන්න. අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය සම්පූර්ණයක් දෙකට පහත් වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, CNN මොඩේල් වලට පහත් වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, අන්තිම පිළිබඳින් 1204 අන්තිම දෙන්නෙක්, අන්තිම විශේෂතාවය අපේ හොඳම F1score 0.65804 (ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන්).", 'no': 'Den delte « Capturing Discriminate Attributtar » er den tiende oppgåva, samsvart med semiEval2018. Oppgåva er å forhåndsvisa om eit ord kan henta ulike attributt av ein ord frå ein annan ord. Vi bruker Glove- ord innebygging, før- trent på opna kjerne korpus for denne oppgåva. Ein grunnrepresentasjon er oppretta i oppstart over varierte dimensjonar. Desse representasjonane er evaluerte basert på valeringspoeng over to modell, først på ein SVM-basert klassifiserer og andre på ein ein dimensjons CNN-modell. Poeng vert brukt for å utvikla representasjonen med vektorkombinasjonar lenger ved å gjera opp forskjellige avstandsverdiar. Desse målene tilsvarar forskyvingsvektorane som er samsvara som funksjonar, hovudsakelig for å forbetra F1scoren med den beste nøyaktigheten. F1score Vårt evalueringa er redusert ned til to representasjonar, klassifisert på CNN-modeller, med totalt dimensjon på 1204 og 1203 for dei siste tillegga. Av dei to første funksjonane har F1score vårt beste 0,658024 (som resultat).', 'ta': "'பிடிக்கும் வகுப்பு குணங்கள்' பகிர்ந்த கேள்வி பத்தாவது பணியாகும், SemEval2018 யுடன் இணை The task is to predict if a word can capture distinguishing attributes of one word from another.  நாங்கள் GloVe வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கம் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், இந்த பணிக்கு முன்னால் பயிற்சி மூலம் தெளிவாக மூலம் கோர அடிப்படை குறிப்பிடுதல் முதலில் மாறுபட்ட பரிமாணங்களுக்கு மேல் நிறுவப்பட்டுள்ளது. இந்த குறிப்புகள் செலுத்தல் மதிப்புகளை இரண்டு மாதிரிகளில் அடிப்படையாக மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது, முதலில் SVM அடிப்படையில் வகுப்பாளர் மற்ற வெக்டார் இணைப்புகளுடன் மேலும் குறிப்பிடப்படும் மதிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தப்படும், பல தூரத்தின் அளவுகளை பார்த்துக குணங்களாக எண்ணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள நெறிகளுக்கு இந்த தேர்வுகள் சிறந்த சரிபார்வையுடன் F1புள்ளியில் மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு பொருத் பிறகு செல்லுபடியாகும் மதிப்பெண்களின் மேலும் குணங்கள் F1புள்ளியை அடைய முடியும். நம் மதிப்பீடு இரண்டு பிரதிநிதிகளுக்கு குறைந்தது, CNN மாதிரிகளில் வகைப்பட்டது, மொத்த அளவு 1204 மற்றும் 1203 இறுதியாக கட்டளைகளுக்கு முடிவ இரண்டில் உள்ள பின்னணி குணங்களில் எங்கள் சிறந்த F1 மதிப்பு 0. 658024 (முடிவுக்காக).", 'ur': 'پرسش کا دسویں دنیا ہے جو SemEval2018 کے ساتھ ملے گی۔ یہ کام صرف پیش بینی کرنا ہے کہ اگر ایک کلم ایک کلم سے فرق کرنے والی آئیتوں کو پکڑ سکتا ہے۔ ہم اس کام کے لئے گلٹی کلمہ استعمال کرتے ہیں جو اس سے پہلے کھلی کھلی جسم پر آموزش کی گئی ہے۔ ایک بنیاد نمایش آغاز سے مختلف اندازوں پر قائم ہوئی ہے. یہ نمونات دو نمونڈلوں پر validation scores پر بنیاد رکھے جاتے ہیں، پہلے ایک SVM بنیاد کلاسیر پر اور دوسرے ایک اندازہ سین مدل پر۔ اسکوروں کو ویکتوروں کی ترکیب کے ساتھ نمایش کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، مختلف فاصلہ اندازے کے مطابق. یہ اندازے افسٹ ویکتروں کے ساتھ مطابق ہیں جن کو ویکتروں کے ساتھ مطابق سمجھا جاتا ہے، سب سے زیادہ F1score کے ساتھ بہترین دقیق کے ساتھ. اس کے بعد ویلڈیٹ اسکور پر زیادہ تغییر کیے جاتے ہیں، جو سب سے بالاترین F1score تک پہنچ سکتے ہیں. ہمارا ارزیابی دو نمائندوں سے کم کر دیا گیا ہے، سی ان کے نمائندل پر کلیسی کر دیا گیا ہے، اور آخری نمائندس کے لئے 1204 & 1203 کی عملہ اندازہ ہے. ان دونوں میں سے، آخری فرصت کی نمایش نے ہمارے بہترین F1score کو 0.658024 (نتیجہ کے طور پر) پہنچایا۔', 'sv': 'Den delade uppgiften "Fånga diskriminerande attribut" är den tionde uppgiften, tillsammans med SemEval2018. Uppgiften är att förutsäga om ett ord kan fånga särskiljande attribut för ett ord från ett annat. Vi använder GloVe word embedding, pre-utbildad på öppet källkod corpus för denna uppgift. En basrepresentation upprättas ursprungligen över olika dimensioner. Dessa representationer utvärderas baserat på valideringspoäng över två modeller, först på en SVM-baserad klassificerare och andra på en CNN-modell med en dimension. Poängen används för att vidareutveckla representationen med vektorkombinationer, genom att överväga olika avståndsmått. Dessa mått motsvarar offset vektorer som är sammankopplade som funktioner, främst för att förbättra F1scoren, med bästa noggrannhet. Funktionerna justeras sedan ytterligare på valideringspoängen för att uppnå högsta F1score. Vår utvärdering inskränktes till två representationer, klassificerade på CNN-modeller, med en total dimensionslängd på 1204 & 1203 för de slutliga inlämningarna. Av de två gav den senare funktionen vår bästa F1score på 0,658024 (per resultat).', 'so': 'Qeybta la xiriira takoorka sinnaanta waa shaqada tobanaad ee la xiriira SemEval2018. Shaqada waa in la sii sheegaa in ereygu uu qabsan karo noocyada isku hadal ah oo kala duwan karo. We use GloVe word embedding, pre-trained on openly sourced corpus for this task.  Qofka aasaasiga ah waxaa marka ugu horeysa la dhisay qaab kala duduwan. Dhaqaalahan waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa qiyaastii lagu xaqiijiyey laba tusaale oo ka badan, marka hore waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa fasax ku saleysan SVM iyo labaad oo ku qoran qaab keliya CNN. Iskuulaadka waxaa loogu isticmaalaa in la sii kordhiyo wadanka wadooyinka, si loo fiirsado qiyaastii kala duwan. Measuradan waxay u eg yihiin wadooyin loo yaqaan, sida gaar ah horumarinta kooxda F1, si aad u saxdaan. Sidaa darteed waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa qiimaha xaqiijinta, si uu u helo scorta ugu sareeya F1. Qiimeynteena waxaa hoos u yaraaday labo qof oo ku qoran samooyinka CNN, wuxuuna haystay dhererka ugu dambeeya 1204 iyo 1203. Labadii nooc waxaa ka mid ah qeybta ugu dambeeyay inay keeneen kooxda ugu wanaagsan ee F1score 0.658024 (sabab darteed).', 'uz': "request is tenth task, SemEval2018 bilan birlashtirish. Bu vazifa bir so'zning xossalarini bir so'zdan ajratish mumkin. Biz shu vazifa uchun ochiq manbani kopus bilan oldin gapiradigan GloVe soʻzdan foydalanamiz. Bir xil oʻlchami bilan boshlanadi. These representations are evaluated based on validation scores over two models, first on an SVM based classifier and second on a one dimension CNN model.  Qiymatlar boshqa masofadan tasavvur qilish uchun vektor birlashtirilgan tashkilotni bajarish uchun ishlatiladi. Bu amallar moslamalarni xususiyatlar deb belgilangan vektorlarga mos keladi. Xossalari Bizning qiymatlarimiz CNN modellariga bog'liqlangan ikkita representatorga ega bo'ldi. Oxirgi imkoniyatlar uchun umumiy kengaytmasi 1204 va 1203. Ikkita tashkilotning oxirgi xususiyatli 0.658024 dan eng yaxshi F1 scori beradi (natijada).", 'vi': "The'Bắt trả thù thuộc tính'sharyêu cầu là nhiệm vụ hàng chục lần, kết hợp với SemEvul208. Nhiệm vụ là dự đoán nếu một từ có thể ghi nhận được đặc trưng của một từ từ khác. Chúng tôi dùng từ GloVe embedding, pre-educated on công khai nguồn hữu cơ cho nhiệm vụ này. Ban đầu, một đại diện cơ bản được xác định trên các chiều khác nhau. Các biểu hiện này được đánh giá dựa trên điểm thẩm tra hơn hai mẫu, đầu tiên là một nhà phân loại dựa vào SVM và thứ hai thuộc một chiều mô hình CNN. Các điểm được dùng để phát triển đại diện với các loại vector, bằng cách xem xét các biện pháp cách xa nhau. Những biện pháp này tương ứng với các véc- tơ bị nhòe dạng dạng đặc trưng, chủ yếu nâng tầm F1số, với độ chính xác cao nhất. Các tính năng được chỉnh thêm vào các điểm thẩm tra, để đạt được điểm F1số cao nhất. Sự đánh giá của chúng tôi thu hẹp xuống hai biểu tượng, được phân loại trên mẫu CNN, với độ dài chiều không gian tổng của 1204... và 1200 để đệ trình cuối cùng. Trong số hai, các đặc trưng này đã cung cấp con số F1số số tốt nhất của 0.658234 (theo kết quả).", 'da': 'Den delte opgave "Capture Discriminative Attributes" er den tiende opgave, sammen med SemEval2018. Opgaven er at forudsige, om et ord kan fange adskilte attributter for et ord fra et andet. Vi bruger GloVe ord embedding, præ-trænet på åbent kilde corpus til denne opgave. En basisrepræsentation er oprindeligt etableret over forskellige dimensioner. Disse repræsentationer evalueres baseret på valideringsscorer over to modeller, først på en SVM baseret klassificering og anden på en én dimension CNN model. Scorene bruges til at videreudvikle repræsentationen med vektorkombinationer ved at overveje forskellige distancemålinger. Disse mål svarer til offset vektorer, der er sammenkoblet som funktioner, hovedsagelig for at forbedre F1scoren, med den bedste nøjagtighed. Funktionerne justeres derefter yderligere på valideringsscorerne for at opnå højeste F1score. Vores evaluering indsnævrede sig til to repræsentationer, klassificeret på CNN modeller, med en samlet dimensionslængde på 1204 & 1203 for de endelige indsendelser. Af de to leverede sidstnævnte funktion repræsentation vores bedste F1score på 0,658024 (pr. resultat).', 'bg': 'Задачата "Заснемане на дискриминационни атрибути" е десетата задача, съвместна със СемЕвал2018. Задачата е да се предскаже дали дадена дума може да улови отличителните атрибути на една дума от друга. За тази задача използваме вграждане на думи, предварително обучени върху открит корпус. Основното представяне първоначално се установява в различни измерения. Тези представи се оценяват въз основа на оценки за валидиране на два модела, първият въз основа на класификатор на SVM и вторият въз основа на едноизмерен модел на CNN. Резултатите се използват за по-нататъшно развитие на представянето с векторни комбинации, като се вземат предвид различни измервания на разстоянието. Тези мерки съответстват на офсетни вектори, които са конкатенирани като характеристики, главно за подобряване на резултата с най-добра точност. След това функциите се настройват допълнително на оценките за валидиране, за да се постигне най-висок резултат. Нашата оценка стесни кръга до две представяния, класифицирани по моделите на CNN, с обща дължина на размерите 1204 и 1203 за окончателните предложения. От двете, последното представяне на функциите даде най-добрия резултат от 0.658024 (според резултата).', 'nl': "De gedeelde taak 'Discriminatieve Attributes vastleggen' is de tiende taak, samen met SemEval2018. De taak is om te voorspellen of een woord onderscheidende eigenschappen van het ene woord van het andere kan bevatten. We gebruiken GloVe woord embedding, voorgetraind op open source corpus voor deze taak. Een basisrepresentatie wordt aanvankelijk vastgesteld over verschillende dimensies. Deze representaties worden geëvalueerd op basis van validatiescores over twee modellen, ten eerste op een SVM gebaseerde classificator en ten tweede op een one dimensie CNN model. De scores worden gebruikt om de weergave met vectorcombinaties verder te ontwikkelen, door rekening te houden met verschillende afstandsmaatregelen. Deze metingen komen overeen met offset vectoren die zijn samengevoegd als kenmerken, voornamelijk om de F1score te verbeteren, met de beste nauwkeurigheid. De functies worden vervolgens verder afgestemd op de validatiescores, om de hoogste F1score te bereiken. Onze evaluatie beperkt zich tot twee representaties, geclassificeerd op CNN modellen, met een totale afmetingslengte van 1204,1203 voor de uiteindelijke inzendingen. Van de twee leverde de laatste feature representatie onze beste F1score van 0.658024 (volgens resultaat).", 'de': "Die geteilte Aufgabe 'Erfassen diskriminierender Attribute' ist die zehnte Aufgabe, in Verbindung mit SemEval2018. Die Aufgabe besteht darin, vorherzusagen, ob ein Wort Unterscheidungsmerkmale eines Wortes von einem anderen erfassen kann. Für diese Aufgabe verwenden wir GloVe Word Embedding, vortrainiert auf frei beschafften Korpus. Eine Basisdarstellung wird zunächst über unterschiedliche Dimensionen aufgebaut. Diese Darstellungen werden anhand von Validierungswerten über zwei Modelle ausgewertet, erstens auf einem SVM-basierten Klassifikator und zweitens auf einem Ein-Dimension-CNN-Modell. Die Scores werden verwendet, um die Darstellung mit Vektorkombinationen unter Berücksichtigung verschiedener Abstandsmaße weiterzuentwickeln. Diese Maße entsprechen Offsetvektoren, die als Merkmale verkettet werden, hauptsächlich um den F1score mit der besten Genauigkeit zu verbessern. Die Funktionen werden dann weiter auf die Validierungsscores abgestimmt, um den höchsten F1score zu erzielen. Unsere Bewertung beschränkte sich auf zwei Darstellungen, klassifiziert auf CNN-Modelle, mit einer Gesamtdimensionslänge von 1204,1203 für die endgültigen Einreichungen. Von den beiden lieferte die letztgenannte Feature-Darstellung unseren besten F1score von 0.658024 (nach Ergebnis).", 'hr': '"Uključenje diskriminacijskih atributa" dijelilo je deseti zadatak, povezan s SemEval2018. Taj zadatak je predviđati da li riječ može uhvatiti različite atribute jedne riječi od druge. Koristimo Glove riječ uključenu, predobučenu na otvoreno izraženi korpus za ovaj zadatak. Predstava baze je početno utvrđena preko različitih dimenzija. Ove predstave se procjenjuju na temelju rezultata validacije preko dva model a, prvo na klasifikatoru baziranom na SVM-u i drugo na jednoj dimenziji CNN modela. Rezultati se koriste za daljnje razvijanje zastupanja s kombinacijom vektora s obzirom na različite mjere udaljenosti. Te mjere odgovaraju premještajnim vektorima koji su potvrđeni kao karakteristike, uglavnom da bi poboljšali F1score s najboljom preciznošću. Onda se karakteristike dalje uključuju na rezultate validacije, kako bi postigli najviši F1score. Naša procjena je smanjena na dvije zastupe, klasifikovane na CNN modelima, imajući ukupnu dužinu dimenzije 1204 i 1203 za konačne isporuke. Od njih dvojice, posljednja predstava je dostavila naš najbolji F1rezultat od 0,658024 (po rezultatu).', 'ko': '구분 속성 캡처 공유 임무는 SemEval 2018과 결합한 10번째 임무입니다.이 임무는 한 단어가 한 단어와 다른 단어의 구별 속성을 포착할 수 있는지 예측하는 것이다.우리는 장갑어를 끼워 넣고 출처를 공개하는 어료 라이브러리에 예비 훈련을 한다.기본적으로 처음에는 서로 다른 차원에서 세워졌다는 것을 나타낸다.이러한 표시는 SVM 기반 분류기, 1차원 CNN 모델 기반 1차원 검증 점수를 기준으로 평가한다는 두 모델의 검증 점수를 기반으로 한다.각종 거리와 도량을 고려하여 점수는 벡터 조합을 더욱 발전시키는 데 쓰인다.이러한 도량은 특징 직렬로 연결된 편이 벡터에 대응하는데 주로 최적 정밀도로 점수를 개선하기 위해서이다.그리고 검증 점수에 따라 이 기능들을 한층 더 조정하여 가장 높은 F1 점수를 얻는다.우리의 평가는 CNN 모델에 따라 최종적으로 제출된 총 사이즈 길이는 1204와 1203으로 두 가지 표현으로 축소되었다.이 두 가지 특징 중 뒷부분은 우리의 가장 좋은 점수인 0.658024(결과에 따라)를 제공했다는 것을 나타낸다.', 'sw': "The 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes' sharedtask is the tenth task, conjoint with SemEval2018.  Kazi ni kutabiri kama neno linaweza kupata tofauti za maneno moja kutoka kwa moja. Tunatumia neno la GloVe linalojumuisha, lililofundishwa kabla kwenye makampuni yanayotumiwa wazi kwa ajili ya kazi hii. Uwakilishaji wa msingi kwa mara ya kwanza umewekwa kwa kiasi kikubwa. Wawakilishi hawa unapitishwa kwa kutumia vipimo vya uhakika zaidi ya mifano miwili, kwanza kwa mtindo wa SVM anayeishi SVM na pili kwenye mtindo mmoja wa CNN. Takwimu hizo zinatumiwa kuendeleza uwakilishi kwa muungano wa vector, kwa kuzingatia hatua mbalimbali za umbali. Hatua hizi zinahusiana na vectors zilizotengenezwa kama alama, hasa kuboresha vipindi vya F1, kwa ufanisi bora. The features are then further tuned on the validation scores, to achieve highest F1score.  Utafiti wetu ulipungua hadi wawili wakilishi, ulioandikwa kwenye mifano ya CNN, na kuwa na kiwango kikubwa cha ukubwa wa 1204 na 1203 kwa ajili ya ujumbe wa mwisho. Katika wawili hao, uwakilishi wa pili ulitoa kipindi chetu cha F1 cha 0.658024 (matokeo yake).", 'fa': 'سهام «ویژه\u200cهای جدایی\u200cگرایی» سهام دهمین وظیفه است که با SemEval2018 متصل می\u200cشود. وظیفه این است که پیش\u200cبینی کنیم آیا یک کلمه می\u200cتواند ویژگی\u200cهای جدا کردن یک کلمه از یک کلمه دیگر را بگیرد. ما از کلمه "Glove" استفاده می کنیم که برای این کار، پیش آموزش داده شده است. یک نمایش بنیادی در ابتدایی بر روی اندازه\u200cهای متفاوت ثابت می\u200cشود. این نمایش\u200cدهندگان بر اساس نمایش\u200cهای تصدیق کردن بیش از دو مدل ارزیابی می\u200cشوند، اول بر اساس یک نمایش\u200cدهنده\u200cی SVM بنیاد و دوم بر اساس یک نمایش\u200cدهنده\u200cی CNN. نمونه\u200cها برای بیشتر تولید نمایش با ترکیب\u200cهای ویکتور، با توجه به اندازه\u200cهای فاصله\u200cای مختلف استفاده می\u200cشوند. این اندازه\u200cها با ویکتورهای نافسیت که به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای متصل شده\u200cاند، با بهترین دقیقیت، با بهترین اندازه\u200cهای F1تفاوت می\u200cکنند. سپس ویژگی\u200cها بر امتیاز تصدیق کردن، برای رسیدن به بالاترین امتیاز F1 تنظیم می\u200cشوند. ارزیابی ما به دو نمایش کم شد که در مدل CNN مخفی شده بود و طول عمومی 1204 & 1203 برای تسلیم نهایی داشت. از آن دو، نمایش آخرین ویژه بهترین نمایش F1 از 0.658024 (به عنوان نتیجه).', 'id': "Tugas terbagi 'Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif' adalah tugas ke-10, bersama dengan SemEval2018. Tugas adalah untuk memprediksi apakah kata dapat menangkap atribut yang membedakan satu kata dari yang lain. Kami menggunakan kata GloVe embedding, pra-dilatih pada tubuh yang terbuka sumber untuk tugas ini. Perwakilan dasar awalnya ditetapkan atas dimensi berbeda. Perwakilan ini diuji berdasarkan skor validasi atas dua model, pertama pada klasifikasi berdasarkan SVM dan kedua pada model CNN satu dimensi. Skor digunakan untuk mengembangkan lebih lanjut representation dengan kombinasi vektor, dengan mempertimbangkan berbagai ukuran jarak. Ukuran ini cocok dengan vektor offset yang dikonsumsi sebagai fitur, terutama untuk memperbaiki skor F1, dengan akurasi terbaik. Karakteristik-karakteristik kemudian ditetapkan lebih lanjut pada skor validasi, untuk mencapai skor F1 tertinggi. Evaluasi kami sempit sampai dua representation, diklasifikasikan pada model CNN, memiliki panjang dimensi total 1204 & 1203 untuk pengiriman akhir. Dari keduanya, representation karakter terakhir memberikan skor F1 terbaik kita 0,658024 (sebagai hasil).", 'sq': "Detyra e ndarë e 'Kapja e atributeve diskriminuese' është detyra e dhjetë, e bashkuar me SemEval2018. Detyra është të parashikohet nëse një fjalë mund të kapë atributet e dalluar të një fjale nga tjetra. We use GloVe word embedding, pre-trained on openly sourced corpus for this task.  Një përfaqësim bazë është krijuar fillimisht mbi dimensione të ndryshme. Këto përfaqësime vlerësohen bazuar në rezultatet e vlerësimit mbi dy modele, së pari në një klasifikues të bazuar në SVM dhe të dytën në një model CNN me një dimension. Rezultatet përdoren për të zhvilluar më tej përfaqësimin me kombinime vektorësh duke konsideruar masa të ndryshme distance. Këto masat korrespondojnë me vektorët e kompensimit që janë të shkurtuar si karakteristika, kryesisht për të përmirësuar rezultatin F1, me saktësinë më të mirë. Karakteristikat do të rregullohen më tej në rezultatet e vlerësimit, për të arritur rezultatin më të lartë F1score. Vlerësimi ynë u ngushtua në dy përfaqësime, të klasifikuara në modelet CNN, me një gjatësi të dimensionit total prej 1204 & 1203 për paraqitjet përfundimtare. Of the two, the latter feature representation delivered our best F1score of 0.658024 (as per result).", 'am': 'ጠይቅ ከSemEval2018 ጋር አሥረኛ ስራ ነው፡፡ የንግግር ቃላት የአንድ ቃላትን ከመለየት የሚችል መሆኑን ለመቀበል ነው፡፡ የGloVe ቃላት አቀማመጥ፣ ለዚህ ስራ የተገኘ የግልፅ ቋንቋ ክሮፕስ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ A base representation is initially established over varied dimensions.  እነዚህም መልዕክቶች በሁለት ዓይነቶች ላይ በሚያስተካክሉ ቁጥር፣ በመጀመሪያው በSVM ላይ መጻፊያ እና በሁለተኛው ክፍል ላይ በCNN ሞዴል ላይ የተመሳሰሉ ናቸው፡፡ ነጥቦች በተለያዩ መጠቀሚያዎች በመጠቀም፣ የዌctor ግንኙነትን በመጠቀም ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ እነዚህም መስኮቶች በአፍሪካዊ የF1score ለማሻሻለል በተሻለ እርግጠኛ መጠቀም የሚቆጠሩ vectors ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ ምርጫዎቻችን በCNN ሞዴል ላይ በተለየ ሁለት መልዕክቶች ላይ አጭር ነው፤ የፍጻሜው መልዕክቶች የ1204 እና 1203 ርዝመት ነው፡፡ ከሁለቱም የኋለኛው የፊደል ግንኙነት የ0.658024 ጥቅምነት አዳረሰ፡፡', 'af': 'Die "Discriminatiewe Attribute" deel is die tiende taak, saamgevoeg met SemEval2018. Die taak is om te voorskou as \'n woord \'n woord kan opneem die eienskappe van een woord van \'n ander woord. Ons gebruik Glove woord inbêring, vooraf-opgelei op openlik uitgevoer korpus vir hierdie taak. Name Hierdie voorstellings word uitgewerk gebaseer op geldigheidskakels oor twee modele, eerste op \'n SVM gebaseerde klassifiseerder en tweede op \'n een dimensie CNN model. Die telling word gebruik om die voorstelling met vektor kombinasies verder te ontwikkel deur verskillende afstand maatskappe te onderwerp. Hierdie maatskappe is ooreenstemmende met offset vektores wat as funksies gesluit word, hoofsaaklik om op die F1punt te verbeter, met die beste presisie. Die funksies word dan verder aangestel op die geldigheidskakels, om die hoogste F1score te bereik. Ons evaluering het af na twee voorstellings geklassifiseer op CNN modele, met \'n totaal dimensie lengte van 1204 & 1203 vir die eindelike onderstellings. Van die twee, die laaste funksie verteenwoording het ons beste F1score van 0. 658024 (as per resultaat).', 'az': '"Discriminativ Attributları" paylaşdığı sorğu, SemEval2018 ilə birləşdirilmiş on işdir. Bu iş, bir sözün bir sözün ayırma qüdrətlərini başqa sözündən tutub apara biləcəyini təmin etməkdir. Biz Glove sözünü bu işin üçün açıq-aşkar təhsil edilmiş korpus üçün istifadə edirik. Əsas göstəricisi ilk dəyişiklik ölçülərin üstündə qurulur. Bu göstəricilər iki model üstündə təsdiqlənmə müqabiliyyətlərinə dayanan, ilk SVM tabanlı klasifikatçı və ikinci ölçü CNN modeli üstündə təsdiqlənmə müqabiliyyətlərinə dayanan. Nöqtələr, vektor kombinatsiyaları ilə göstərilməsini daha da artırmaq üçün, müxtəlif uzaq ölçülərini düşünərək kullanılır. Bu ölçülər f1poçt üstündə ən yaxşı doğruluqla, f1poçt üstündə düzəltmək üçün müəyyən edilən offset vektörlərinə uyuşar. Bütün xüsusiyyətlər daha çox təsdiqlənmək nöqtələrində, ən yüksək F1 nöqtəsinə yetişmək üçün təsdiqlənir. Növbətimiz CNN modellərə sıralanmış iki göstərilməyə azaldı, sonuncu göndərmələr üçün tamamilə ölçüdə 1204 & 1203 uzunluğu vardır. İkisindən son xüsusiyyət göstəricisi bizim ən yaxşı F1scoremizi 0,658024 ilə təmin etdi.', 'bn': "'ক্যাপ্টেনিং বৈষম্য বৈষম্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য' শেয়ার করার প্রশ্ন হচ্ছে দশম কাজ, সেমEval2018 এর সাথে যোগ দিয়ে। কাজ হচ্ছে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা যায় যদি একটি শব্দ অন্য একটি শব্দের বৈচিত্র্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য ধরা যায়। আমরা গ্লোভি শব্দ ব্যবহার করি, প্রথম প্রশিক্ষিত এই কাজের জন্য প্রকাশ্য সোর্স কর্পাসের জন্য। A base representation is initially established over varied dimensions.  These representations are evaluated based on validation scores over two models, first on an SVM based classifier and second on a one dimension CNN model.  বিভিন্ন দূরত্বের ব্যবস্থা বিবেচনা করে এই স্কোর ব্যবহার করা হয়। এই পদক্ষেপগুলো অফ-সেট ভেক্টরের সাথে যুক্ত, যাদের বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে বিশেষ করে এফ১ স্কোরে উন্নতি করার জন্য, যারা সর্বোচ এরপর বৈধ স্কোরের উপর বৈধ বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী আরো সংক্রান্ত করা হয়, যাতে সর্বোচ্চ F1স্কোর অর্জন করা  আমাদের মূল্য সংক্রান্ত দুটি প্রতিনিধিত্বের পরিমাণ কমে গেছে, সিএনএন মডেলে বিস্তারিত হয়েছে, যার মোট দীর্ঘ ১২০৪ এবং ১২৩ জনের শেষ উভয়ের মধ্যে শেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব আমাদের সর্বোচ্চ এফ১ স্কোর প্রদান করেছে (ফলাফলের মধ্যে)।", 'tr': "'Gaýratyn çykyş hasaplaryň' soragy SemEval2018 bilen bölegi 10-nji buýrukdyr. Bu zady bir söz başga sözden tapawutlandyrmak üçin önlenmeli. Biz Glove sözü bu işe üçin açyk şeklinde bilinmeli korpus üçin ulanýarys. Başga çeşitli ölçüler üzerinde üýtgedildi. Bu çykyşlar iki nusga üstündeki çykyşlardan daýan ýar, ilkinji SVM tabanly klasifikatçy we ikinji baýram CNN nusga üstünde deňlenýär. Bu sayılar, vektör kombinatsiyaları ile farklı mesafe ölçülerini düşünerek geliştirmek için kullanılır. Bu çəkiler özellikler diýip poz vektöre eşleýär. Özellikde F1 अंश we gowy dogrylygy bilen birleşdirmek üçin ylalaşýar. Bu hat lariň üstine F1score üçin janlaşdyrylýar. Taýýarlanmamyz CNN modellerinde klasifik edilen iki temsile çykdy, soňky göndermeler üçin toplam boyutlu 1204 & 1203 boyutlu. Ikinji üçin, soňky täsirler biziň iň gowy F1अ 0.658024 (netijede bolsa).", 'bs': '"Uhvatanje diskriminacijskih atributa" podijeljeno pitanje je deseti zadatak, povezan s SemEval2018. Taj zadatak je predviđati da li riječ može uhvatiti različite atribute jedne riječi od druge. Koristimo Glove riječ uključenu, predobučenu na otvoreno sourced corpus za ovaj zadatak. Predstavljanje baze je početno utvrđeno preko različitih dimenzija. Ove predstave se procjenjuju na temelju rezultata validacije preko dva model a, prvo na klasifikatoru baziranom na SVM-u i drugo na jednoj dimenziji CNN modela. Rezultati se koriste za daljnje razvijanje zastupanja sa kombinacijom vektora s obzirom na različite mjere udaljenosti. Ove mjere odgovaraju premještajnim vektorima koji su potvrđeni kao karakteristike, uglavnom da bi poboljšali F1score, sa najboljom preciznošću. Objekti se onda dodatno uključuju na rezultate validacije, kako bi postigli najviši F1score. Naša procjena je smanjena na dvije zastupe, klasifikovane na CNN modelima, imajući ukupnu dužinu dimenzije 1204 & 1203 za konačne isporuke. Od njih dvojice, poslednja predstava je dostavila naš najbolji F1rezultat od 0,658024 (kao rezultat).', 'cs': 'Sdílený úkol "Zachycení diskriminačních atributů" je desátým úkolem spojeným se SemEval2018. Úkolem je předpovědět, zda slovo dokáže zachytit rozlišovací atributy jednoho slova od druhého. Pro tento úkol používáme GloVe vkládání slov, předškolené na otevřeném korpusu. Základní reprezentace je zpočátku vytvořena v různých rozměrech. Tyto reprezentace jsou hodnoceny na základě validačního skóre ve dvou modelech, první na klasifikátoru založeném na SVM a druhé na jednorozměrném CNN modelu. Skóre slouží k dalšímu rozvoji reprezentace s vektorovými kombinacemi, s ohledem na různé vzdálenostní měřítka. Tato měřítka odpovídají offsetovým vektorům, které jsou řetězeny jako vlastnosti, zejména pro zlepšení F1skóre, s nejvyšší přesností. Funkce jsou pak dále laděny na ověřovací skóre, aby bylo dosaženo nejvyššího F1skóre. Naše hodnocení se zúžilo na dvě reprezentace klasifikované na modelech CNN s celkovou délkou rozměrů 1204.1203 pro konečné podání. Z těchto dvou prvků poslední reprezentace přinesla náš nejlepší F1skóre 0.658024 (dle výsledku).', 'fi': "Jakettu 'Syrjinnyttävien attribuuttien kaappaaminen' -tehtävä on kymmenes tehtävä, joka yhdistetään SemEval2018:n kanssa. Tehtävänä on ennustaa, voiko sana vangita sanan erottavia ominaisuuksia toisesta. Käytämme GloVe-sanaupotusta, joka on ennalta koulutettu avoimesti hankitulle korpuselle tähän tehtävään. Perusesitys muodostetaan aluksi eri ulottuvuuksiin. Näitä esityksiä arvioidaan kahden mallin validointiprosenttien perusteella, joista ensimmäinen perustuu SVM-luokitukseen ja toinen yhden ulottuvuuden CNN-malliin. Pisteiden avulla voidaan edelleen kehittää esitystä vektoriyhdistelmillä eri etäisyyksiä ajatellen. Nämä mitat vastaavat offset-vektoreita, jotka yhdistetään ominaisuuksiksi, pääasiassa F1score-arvon parantamiseksi parhaalla tarkkuudella. Tämän jälkeen ominaisuuksia viritetään edelleen validointipisteisiin, jotta saavutetaan korkein F1score. Arviointimme rajoittui kahteen CNN-malleihin luokiteltuun esitykseen, joiden kokonaismittapituus on 1204 ja 1203 lopullisten ehdotusten osalta. Näistä kahdesta jälkimmäinen ominaisuusesitys tuotti parhaan F1score 0,658024 (tuloksen mukaan).", 'hy': 'Իսկ «Դիսկրմինատիվ առանձնահատկությունների բռնումը» բաժանված հանձնարարությունը տասներորդ հանձնարարությունն է, որը միավորվում է ՍեմԵվալ 2018-ի հետ: Պատրաստվում է կանխատեսել, թե բառը կարող է վերցնել բառի տարբերակող առանձնահատկությունները մեկ բառից մյուսից: Մենք օգտագործում ենք Գլովի բառը ներգրավելու համար, նախապատրաստված բաց կորպուսի վրա: Սկզբում հիմնական ներկայացումը կազմված է տարբեր չափերի վրա: Այս ներկայացումները գնահատվում են հիմնված երկու մոդելների վերաբերյալ հավասարման գնահատականների վրա, առաջինը՝ համակարգչային համակարգչային դասակարգչային, երկրորդը՝ համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգ Այս գնահատականները օգտագործվում են տարբեր հեռավորության չափումների միջոցով ներկայացուցիչ զարգացնելու համար: Այս չափումները համապատասխանում են օֆեկտիվ վեկտորներին, որոնք հատուկ են որպես հատկություններ, հիմնականում F1գնահատման բարելավման համար, լավագույն ճշգրտությամբ: Այնուհետև առանձնահատկությունները ավելի լավ հարմարեցվում են հավասարման գնահատականների վրա, որպեսզի հասնենք F1գնահատականների ամենամեծ գնահատականներին: Our evaluation narrowed down to two representations, classified on CNN models, having a total dimension length of 1204 & 1203 for the final submissions.  Երկուսից վերջին հատկանիշների ներկայացումը բերեց մեր լավագույն F1գնահատականը՝ 0.658024 (ըստ արդյունքի):', 'et': 'Jagatud ülesanne "Diskrimineerivate atribuutide tabamine" on kümnes ülesanne, mis koos SemEval2018-ga. Ülesanne on ennustada, kas sõna suudab jäädvustada ühe sõna eristavaid atribuute teisest. Selle ülesande jaoks kasutame GloVe sõna manustamist, mis on eelnevalt koolitatud avatud korpusele. Alusesindus moodustatakse algselt erinevate mõõtmetega. Neid esitusi hinnatakse kahe mudeli valideerimiskooride alusel, esiteks SVM-il põhineva klassifikaatori ja teiseks ühe dimensiooniga CNN-i mudeli alusel. Skoorid on kasutatud esituse edasiarendamiseks vektorikombinatsioonidega, arvestades erinevaid kauguse mõõtmeid. Need mõõtmed vastavad nihkevektoritele, mis on seotud omadustena, peamiselt F1skoori parandamiseks parima täpsusega. Seejärel häälestatakse funktsioone valideerimiskooride järgi, et saavutada kõrgeim F1skoor. Meie hinnang piirdus kahe esitusega, mis on liigitatud CNNi mudelitele ja mille lõplike esituste mõõtmete kogupikkus on 1204 ja 1203. Kahest viimasest funktsiooni esitus andis meie parima F1skoori 0,658024 (vastavalt tulemusele).', 'ca': 'La tasca compartida "Capturar atributs discriminatoris"és la décima tasca, conjunta amb SemEval2018. La tasca és predir si una paraula pot capturar atributs distintius d\'una paraula a l\'altra. Utilitzem la paraula GloVe incorporada, pré-entrenada en un cos d\'origen obert per aquesta tasca. Una representació de base s\'estableix inicialment en diverses dimensions. These representations are evaluated based on validation scores over two models, first on an SVM based classifier and second on a one dimension CNN model.  Les puntuacions s\'utilitzen per desenvolupar més la representació amb combinacions de vectors, considerant diverses mesures de distància. These measures correspond to offset vectors which are concatenated as features, mainly to improve upon the F1score, with the best accuracy.  Les característiques s\'ajustan més a les puntuacions de validació, per aconseguir la puntuació F1 més alta. La nostra evaluació es va reduir a dues representacions, classificades en models CNN, tenint una mida total de 1204 i 1203 per les presentacions finals. De les dues, la representació d\'aquestes característiques va aportar la millor puntuació F1 de 0,658024 (com a resultat).', 'ha': "QXml Yi gabani idan wata kalma na iya kiyaye ƙayyade sunaye daga wani kalma. Tuna yi amfani da maganar GoV da aka shigar da shi, a kan wani aikin da aka yi wa shirin bayani An riga an daidaita wani uwarsa a kan ƙanshi na daban-daban. Wannan an a ƙaddara su a kan salon nau'i masu inganci da tsohon shiryoyin biyu, farko, a kan wata SV M-asanin sigarin da na sau kan wata motsi na CNN guda. Ana amfani da score zuwa a ƙara developer mai wakilishi da haɗuwar masu shiryuwa, da kuma a ƙayyade taki masu tsawo. Wannan ƙaddara yana mai kami da shiryoyi na offset waɗanda aka ƙayyade su kamar sifati, mainli don ya sake gyãra kan score F1, da kuma mafi kyaun ƙayyade. Za sa'an nan, za'a yi amfani da wasu zafi kan score na inganci, dõmin ya cika kimar F1. Ana ƙaddara zuwa misalin biyu, wanda aka ƙayyade shi kan misãlai na CNN, yana da girgije guda cikakken 1204 da 1203 ga ƙarshen musulunci. Of the two, the latter feature representation delivered our best F1score of 0.658024 (as per result).", 'jv': 'question task is to preview Awak dhéwé nggunakake Global V sing sumulakno, awak-awak dhéwé wis mbukakipon bukane kanggo nggawe iki. Display routing Display boxes Attribute Me Puntuang Awak dhéwé nglanggar-langgar nganggo sampeyan duwé representasi, kelompok nggo model sing nggawe barang mabur, sampeyan ngono ukuran sampeyan luwih 1 200 4 < 200 3 kanggo nyeleh informasi tapi. deep', 'he': 'המשימה המשותפת של "תפיסת איכויות דיסקרמינציונליות" היא המשימה העשירית, משותפת עם חצי ערך 2018. המשימה היא לחזות אם מילה יכולה לתפוס תכונות מבחינים של מילה אחת מהמילה אחרת. אנו משתמשים במילה גלובה, מאומנים מראש על קורפוס מקור פתוח למשימה הזאת. מייצג בסיס מוקם בהתחלה על מימדים שונים. היציגות האלה נערכות בהתבסס על נקודות אישור על שני דוגמנים, ראשית על קלאסיפור מבוסס על SVM ושנייה על דוגמנית CNN במימד אחד. התוצאות משתמשות בפיתוח נוסף של הייצגות עם שילובים וקטורים, על ידי שיקול מדידות מרחק שונים. המדידות האלה מתאימות לוקטורים פרסים שנמצאים בתור תכונות, בעיקר כדי לשפר על נקודת F1, עם הדיוק הטוב ביותר. המאפיינים מתאימים יותר על נקודות האישור, כדי להשיג את נקודת F1הגבוהה ביותר. הערכה שלנו צמצמה לשני מייצגים, מסווגים על דוגמנים CNN, עם אורך מימדים מוחלט של 1204 & 1203 עבור ההעברות הסופיות. Of the two, the latter feature representation delivered our best F1score of 0.658024 (as per result).', 'sk': 'Deljena naloga "Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov" je deseta naloga skupaj s SemEval2018. Naloga je predvideti, ali lahko beseda zajame različne atribute ene besede od druge. Za to nalogo uporabljamo GloVe besedno vgradnjo, ki je predhodno usposobljeno na odprtem korpusu. Osnovna predstavitev je sprva vzpostavljena na različnih dimenzijah. Te predstavitve so ocenjene na podlagi ocen validacije v dveh modelih, prvi na osnovi klasifikatorja SVM in drugi na enodimenzionalnem CNN modelu. Rezultati se uporabljajo za nadaljnji razvoj reprezentacije z vektorskimi kombinacijami z upoštevanjem različnih meril razdalje. Ti merili ustrezajo odmiknim vektorjem, ki so združeni kot značilnosti, predvsem za izboljšanje F1score z najboljšo natančnostjo. Funkcije se nato nadalje prilagodijo na ocene validacije, da se doseže najvišji F1score. Naša ocena je omejila na dve predstavitvi, uvrščeni na modele CNN, skupno dolžino dimenzij 1204 in 1203 za končne predloge. Od obeh je slednja funkcijska predstavitev prinesla našo najboljšo F1score 0,658024 (glede na rezultat).', 'bo': "'capturing Discriminative Attributes' དེ་ལ་ལས་ཀ་ནི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་རྗེས་སུ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལས་ཐ་སྙད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཁྱད་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་ཐུབ་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་སྒོ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་མཐོ་ཁག་དེ་སྤྱོད་པ་ཡིན། རྨང་གཞི་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་ནི་འགོ་འཛུགས་ནས་ཆེ་ཆུང་སྣེ་བར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ཡོད། These representations are evaluated based on validation scores over two models, first on an SVM based classifier and second on a one dimension CNN model. The scores are used to further develop the representation with vector combinations, by considering various distance measures. These measures correspond to offset vectors which are concatenated as features, mainly to improve on the F1score, with the best accuracy. With the best accuracy. ཆོག་འཆན་དེ་ལས་ཕར་ཐོག་གྲངས་རིམ་ཐམ་ནས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་འཇུག་བྱེད། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ལས་ཇུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད། CNN མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཆེ་བའི་ཚད་1204 & 1203 དེ་མཐའ་མཇུག Of the two, the latter feature representation delivered our best F1score of 0.658024 (as per result)."}
{'en': 'Discriminator at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Minimally Supervised Discrimination', 'ar': 'Discriminator في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: الحد الأدنى من التمييز الخاضع للإشراف', 'fr': 'Discriminator at SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 10\xa0: Discrimination supervisée au minimum', 'pt': 'Discriminador na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Discriminação Minimamente Supervisionada', 'es': 'Discriminador en SemeVal-2018 Tarea 10: Discriminación mínimamente supervisada', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务10歧视:最卑督歧视', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク10での差別化要因：最低限監督された差別', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर भेदभावपूर्ण: न्यूनतम पर्यवेक्षित भेदभाव', 'ru': 'Дискриминатор в SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Дискриминация под минимальным надзором', 'ga': 'Idirdhealaitheoir ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Idirdhealú faoi Mhaoirseacht Íosta', 'ka': 'დისკრიმინატორი semiEval-2018 დავალების 10: მინიმალურად ნახვა დისკრიმინაცია', 'hu': 'Hátrányos megkülönböztető a SemEval-2018-ban 10. feladat: minimálisan felügyelt megkülönböztetés', 'el': 'Καθήκον 10: Ελάχιστα εποπτευόμενη Διακρίσεις', 'it': 'Discriminatore a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Discriminazione minimamente supervisionata', 'kk': 'Дискриминатор 30- 2018 тапсырмасында 10: Төменгі бақылау дискриминациясы', 'lt': 'Diskriminatorius pagal 2010 m. pusmetį 10 užduotis: minimali kontroliuojama diskriminacija', 'mk': 'Дискриминатор на SemEval-2018 задача 10: Минимално надгледувана дискриминација', 'ms': 'Diskriminator di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Diskriminasi Dipengawasi Minimum', 'ml': 'Discriminator at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Minimally Supervised Discrimination', 'mt': 'Diskriminatur f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 10: Diskriminazzjoni Superviża Minimament', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Хамгийн багасгалттай Шүүмжилт', 'pl': 'Dyskryminator w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Dyskryminacja minimalnie nadzorowana', 'no': 'Diskriminator ved halvEval-2018 oppgåve 10: Minimum oversikt diskriminasjon', 'ro': 'Discriminator la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Discriminare supravegheată minim', 'si': 'සෙම්වෙල්-2018 කාර්ය 10 වෙනුවෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා: අඩුවෙන් පරික්ෂා කරනවා විශ්වාස කරනවා', 'so': 'Takoorista xafiiska shaqada SemEval-2018 10: Takoorista ugu yaraan', 'sv': 'Diskriminator på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Minimalt övervakad diskriminering', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி', 'ur': 'نصف Eval-2018 ٹاکس ۱۰ میں تقسیم کرنے والا: کم تحقیق کی تقسیم', 'sr': 'дискриминатор на полевалу-2018 задачу 10: минимално надзорена дискриминация', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifa 10: Minimal Supervised Discrimination', 'vi': 'Sự phân biệt đối xử', 'nl': 'Discriminator bij SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Minimaal gecontroleerd discriminatie', 'da': 'Diskriminator ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Minimalt overvåget diskrimination', 'bg': 'Дискриминатор в Задача 10: Минимално контролирана дискриминация', 'hr': 'Diskriminacija na zadatku 10. poluvremeno-2018: Minimalno nadzirana diskriminacija', 'id': 'Discriminator at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Minimally Supervised Discrimination', 'de': 'Diskriminierung bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Minimal Supervised Diskriminierung', 'ko': 'Semly-Supervision 작업 2018: 최소 감별기 평가', 'fa': 'جدایی\u200cکننده در کوشش ۱۰ سال ۲۰۰۸: جدایی کمترین تحت نظر', 'sq': 'Diskriminator në SemEval-2018 Detyra 10: Diskriminim i mbikqyrur minimalisht', 'sw': 'Mchamiaji katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 10: Ubaguzi wa Kichini', 'tr': 'Saglaýycı at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Minimally Supervised Discrimination', 'hy': '2018-斋 芦諐榨沾苑站铡宅禄-斋 芦諐榨沾苑站铡宅禄-斋 芦諐榨沾苑站铡宅禄-斋 芦諐榨沾苑站铡宅禄-斋 芦諐榨沾苑站铡宅禄-斋 芦諐榨沾苑站铡宅禄 10禄 窄斩栅斋謤炸', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 10: Minimum Supervised Discrimination', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Minimal Supervised Discrimination', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের বিচারক ১০: নিম্নলিখিত বৈষম্য', 'bs': 'Diskriminacija na zadatku 10. polu-Eval-2018: Minimalno nadgledana diskriminacija', 'cs': 'Diskriminátor na SemEval-2018 Úkol 10: Diskriminace s minimálním dohledem', 'et': 'Diskrimineerija SemEval-2018 ülesanne 10: minimaalselt järelevalvetud diskrimineerimine', 'af': 'Diskriminator by SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Minimaal Ondergesien Diskriminasie', 'ca': 'Discriminador en SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Discriminació minimament supervisada', 'fi': 'Syrjinnääjä SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Vähintään valvottu syrjintä', 'sk': 'Diskriminator na SemEval-2018 Naloga 10: minimalno nadzorovana diskriminacija', 'he': 'משימה 10:', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'bo': 'ཤུལ་ལེན་བྱ་ཚོགས་ལྡན་ཁང་པ་(SemEval-2018 Task 10)ལས་གནད་དོན་འགྲོ་བ་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ལྡན་བྱེད།', 'jv': 'Diskiminater at semiinval-2008 task 10: minimly super-Diskiminate'}
{'en': 'We participated to the SemEval-2018 shared task on capturing discriminative attributes (Task 10) with a simple system that ranked 8th amongst the 26 teams that took part in the evaluation. Our final score was 0.67, which is competitive with the winning score of 0.75, particularly given that our system is a zero-shot system that requires no training and minimal parameter optimisation. In addition to describing the submitted system, and discussing the implications of the relative success of such a system on this task, we also report on other, more complex models we experimented with.', 'ar': 'شاركنا في مهمة SemEval-2018 المشتركة حول التقاط السمات التمييزية (المهمة 10) بنظام بسيط احتل المرتبة الثامنة من بين 26 فريقًا شاركوا في التقييم. كانت نتيجتنا النهائية 0.67 ، وهي منافسة لدرجة الفوز البالغة 0.75 ، لا سيما بالنظر إلى أن نظامنا عبارة عن نظام خالي من الضربات ولا يتطلب أي تدريب والحد الأدنى من تحسين المعلمات. بالإضافة إلى وصف النظام المقدم ، ومناقشة الآثار المترتبة على النجاح النسبي لمثل هذا النظام في هذه المهمة ، نقوم أيضًا بالإبلاغ عن النماذج الأخرى الأكثر تعقيدًا التي جربناها.', 'pt': 'Participamos da tarefa compartilhada SemEval-2018 de captura de atributos discriminativos (Tarefa 10) com um sistema simples que ficou em 8º lugar entre as 26 equipes que participaram da avaliação. Nossa pontuação final foi de 0,67, o que é competitivo com a pontuação vencedora de 0,75, principalmente porque nosso sistema é um sistema de tiro zero que não requer treinamento e otimização mínima de parâmetros. Além de descrever o sistema submetido e discutir as implicações do relativo sucesso de tal sistema nesta tarefa, também relatamos outros modelos mais complexos com os quais experimentamos.', 'fr': "Nous avons participé à la tâche partagée SemEval-2018 sur la capture des attributs discriminants (Tâche 10) avec un système simple qui s'est classé 8e parmi les 26 équipes ayant participé à l'évaluation. Notre score final était de 0,67, ce qui est compétitif avec le score gagnant de 0,75, d'autant plus que notre système est un système zéro tir qui ne nécessite aucune formation et une optimisation minimale des paramètres. En plus de décrire le système soumis et de discuter des implications du succès relatif d'un tel système sur cette tâche, nous présentons également d'autres modèles plus complexes que nous avons testés.", 'es': 'Participamos en la tarea compartida SemEval-2018 sobre la captura de atributos discriminativos (Tarea 10) con un sistema simple que ocupó el octavo lugar entre los 26 equipos que participaron en la evaluación. Nuestro marcador final fue de 0,67, que es competitivo con un puntaje ganador de 0,75, especialmente dado que nuestro sistema es un sistema de tiro cero que no requiere entrenamiento y una optimización mínima de los parámetros. Además de describir el sistema presentado y discutir las implicaciones del éxito relativo de dicho sistema en esta tarea, también informamos sobre otros modelos más complejos con los que experimentamos.', 'ja': '評価に参加した26チームの中で8位にランクされたシンプルなシステムで、差別的属性のキャプチャ（タスク10 ）に関するSemEval -2018の共有タスクに参加しました。当社の最終スコアは0.67で、特に当社のシステムはトレーニングを必要とせず、最小限のパラメータ最適化を必要とするゼロショットシステムであるため、0.75という勝ち点と競合しています。提出されたシステムを説明し、このようなシステムの相対的な成功がこのタスクに与える影響を議論することに加えて、私たちは実験した他のより複雑なモデルについても報告します。', 'zh': '吾与SemEval-2018共事,以一简之统获别属性(10),当系统于评估之26团队中排名第8位。 吾终得分为0.67,与0.75之胜有竞争力,特虑吾之系统为一个零,不须训练最小之参数优化。 除叙提交的系统,并讨论这种系统对成功对这件事外,我们还报告了我们试过的他更杂的模样。', 'ru': 'Мы участвовали в SemEval-2018 с простой системой, которая заняла 8-е место среди 26 команд, принявших участие в оценке. Наш окончательный результат составил 0,67, что является конкурентоспособным с выигрышным результатом 0,75, особенно учитывая, что наша система является системой с нулевым выстрелом, которая не требует обучения и минимальной оптимизации параметров. Помимо описания представленной системы и обсуждения последствий относительного успеха такой системы для этой задачи, мы также сообщаем о других, более сложных моделях, с которыми мы экспериментировали.', 'hi': 'हमने SemEval-2018 में एक साधारण प्रणाली के साथ भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं (कार्य 10) को कैप्चर करने पर साझा कार्य में भाग लिया जो मूल्यांकन में भाग लेने वाली 26 टीमों में से 8 वें स्थान पर था। हमारा अंतिम स्कोर 0.67 था, जो 0.75 के जीतने वाले स्कोर के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है, विशेष रूप से यह देखते हुए कि हमारा सिस्टम एक शून्य-शॉट सिस्टम है जिसके लिए कोई प्रशिक्षण और न्यूनतम पैरामीटर ऑप्टिमाइज़ेशन की आवश्यकता नहीं है। प्रस्तुत प्रणाली का वर्णन करने के अलावा, और इस कार्य पर इस तरह की प्रणाली की सापेक्ष सफलता के निहितार्थों पर चर्चा करने के अलावा, हम अन्य, अधिक जटिल मॉडलों पर भी रिपोर्ट करते हैं जिनके साथ हमने प्रयोग किया था।', 'ga': 'Ghlacamar páirt i dtasc comhroinnte SemEval-2018 maidir le tréithe idirdhealaitheacha a ghabháil (Tasc 10) le córas simplí a bhí san 8ú háit i measc na 26 fhoireann a ghlac páirt sa mheastóireacht. Ba é an scór deiridh a bhí againn ná 0.67, atá iomaíoch agus an scór buaiteach 0.75, go háirithe ós rud é gur córas náid lámhaigh é ár gcóras nach dteastaíonn aon oiliúint agus barrfheabhsú paraiméadar íosta. Chomh maith le cur síos a dhéanamh ar an gcóras a cuireadh isteach, agus na himpleachtaí a bhaineann le rathúlacht choibhneasta a leithéid de chóras ar an tasc seo a phlé, tuairiscímid freisin ar mhúnlaí eile níos casta ar bhaineamar triail astu.', 'el': 'Συμμετείχαμε στην κοινή εργασία για την καταγραφή διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών (Εργασία 10) με ένα απλό σύστημα που κατατάχθηκε 8η μεταξύ των 26 ομάδων που συμμετείχαν στην αξιολόγηση. Το τελικό σκορ μας ήταν 0.67, το οποίο είναι ανταγωνιστικό με το νικητήριο σκορ 0.75, ιδιαίτερα δεδομένου ότι το σύστημά μας είναι ένα σύστημα μηδενικής βολής που δεν απαιτεί εκπαίδευση και ελάχιστη βελτιστοποίηση παραμέτρων. Εκτός από την περιγραφή του υποβαλλόμενου συστήματος και τη συζήτηση των επιπτώσεων της σχετικής επιτυχίας ενός τέτοιου συστήματος σε αυτό το έργο, αναφέρουμε επίσης και άλλα, πιο σύνθετα μοντέλα με τα οποία πειραματιστήκαμε.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ SemEval-2018-ს გაყოფილი საქმენო დავაშვებეთ დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების შესახებ (საქმენო 10) სისტემა, რომელიც 26 ჯგუტების შორის 8-ი პერენტირებულია, რომელიც გავამწილეთ ჩვენი ბოლო წერტილი 0.67 იყო, რომელიც 0.75 წერტილის წერტილის კონპექტიურია, სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა, რომ ჩვენი სისტემა 0.67 წერტილი სი დამატებული სისტემის გამოსახულებას და განსახულებას ამ რაოდენობაში სისტემის შესაძლებლობის შემდეგ, ჩვენ ასევე უფრო კომპლექციური მოდელზე გამოყენებთ, რომლებიც ჩვენ ექსპერიმე', 'hu': 'Részt vettünk a SemEval-2018 diszkriminatív tulajdonságok megszerzésével kapcsolatos megosztott feladatban (10. feladat) egy egyszerű rendszerrel, amely az értékelésben részt vevő 26 csapat közül 8. helyezett. A végső pontszámunk 0,67 volt, ami versenyképes a 0,75-ös győztes pontszámmal, különösen tekintettel arra, hogy rendszerünk egy nulla lövéses rendszer, amely nem igényel edzést és minimális paraméterek optimalizálást. A benyújtott rendszer leírása, valamint az ilyen rendszer relatív sikerének e feladatra gyakorolt hatásainak megvitatása mellett más, bonyolultabb modellekről is beszámolunk.', 'it': 'Abbiamo partecipato al compito condiviso SemEval-2018 per acquisire attributi discriminatori (Task 10) con un semplice sistema che si è classificato ottavo tra i 26 team che hanno partecipato alla valutazione. Il nostro punteggio finale è stato di 0,67, che è competitivo con il punteggio vincente di 0,75, soprattutto dato che il nostro sistema è un sistema a tiro zero che non richiede formazione e ottimizzazione minima dei parametri. Oltre a descrivere il sistema presentato e discutere le implicazioni del relativo successo di tale sistema su questo compito, riportiamo anche altri modelli più complessi con cui abbiamo sperimentato.', 'kk': 'Біз 2018 жылдағы semiEval-2018 бөлінген тапсырмасына (10 тапсырма) дискриминациялық атрибуттарды қарапайым жүйе, оқиғандағы 26 топтардың 8- ші ретінде бөлікті. Соңғы нәтижеміз 0,67 болды. Бұл 0,75 жақсы нәтижесімен әсер етіледі, өйткені жүйеміздің нөл шарт жүйесі, оқыту және минимал параметрлердің оптимизациясы керек болмайды. Келтірілген жүйені түсініп, осы тапсырманың салыстырмалы сәттіліктерінің негізгі нәрселерін талқылау үшін, біз сондай-ақ басқа жағдайда мәжбүрлі үлгілер туралы хабарладық.', 'ms': 'Kami berpartisipasi dalam tugas berkongsi SemEval-2018 untuk menangkap atribut diskriminatif (Tugas 10) dengan sistem sederhana yang ditangkap ke-8 diantara 26 pasukan yang berpartisipasi dalam penilaian. Skor terakhir kita adalah 0.67, yang bersaing dengan skor menang 0.75, terutama kerana sistem kita adalah sistem tembakan sifar yang memerlukan tiada latihan dan optimasi parameter minimal. Selain menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar, dan membincangkan implikasi kesuksesan relatif sistem seperti ini pada tugas ini, kami juga melaporkan tentang model yang lain, yang lebih kompleks yang kami eksperimen dengan.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. വിവേചനയില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം പിടിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കാളികളായി പങ്കാള നമ്മുടെ അവസാന സ്കോര്\u200d 0.67 ആയിരുന്നു. അത് 0.75 വിജയിക്കുന്ന സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d എതിര്\u200dത്തുനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം പൂജ്യ ഉത്തരപ്പെടുത്തിയ സിസ്റ്റം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടാതെ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം വിജയത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് സംസാരിക്കുന്', 'mt': 'Parteċipajna fil-kompitu kondiviż SemEval-2018 dwar il-qbid ta’ attributi diskriminatorji (Kompitu 10) b’sistema sempliċi li kklassifikat it-tmien fost is-26 tim li ħadu sehem fl-evalwazzjoni. Il-punteġġ finali tagħna kien ta’ 0.67, li huwa kompetittiv mal-punteġġ rebbieħ ta’ 0.75, partikolarment meta wieħed iqis li s-sistema tagħna hija sistema zero-shot li ma teħtieġ l-ebda taħriġ u ottimizzazzjoni minima tal-parametri. Minbarra d-deskrizzjoni tas-sistema sottomessa, u d-diskussjoni tal-implikazzjonijiet tas-suċċess relattiv ta’ sistema bħal din fuq dan il-kompitu, a ħna nirrappurtaw ukoll dwar mudelli oħra, aktar kumplessi li esperimentawna magħhom.', 'mn': 'Бид 2018 оны SemEval-д хуваалцах үйл ажилд хуваалцаж байсан бөгөөд хуваалцааны харилцаа (Task 10) нь үнэлгээнд оролцсон 26 багийн 8-р багтай энгийн системтэй хуваалцаж байлаа. Манай сүүлийн тоо 0.67 байсан. Энэ нь 0.75 ялагдах тооны өрсөлдөөнтэй байсан. Ялангуяа бидний систем нь сургалт болон бага параметр хангамжийг шаардахгүй 0.67 шагналын систем юм. Дараагдсан системийг тайлбарлаж, ийм системийн харьцангуй амжилтын нөлөөлөлтийг энэ ажлын тухай ярилцаж, бид бас өөр төрлийн төвөгтэй загваруудыг тайлбарлаж байна.', 'no': 'Vi delta delt på den delte oppgåva for semiEval-2018 om å henta diskriminasjonale attributtar (oppgåve 10) med ein enkel system som rangerte 8. mellom de 26 gruppene som delte i evalueringa. Det siste poengtet vårt var 0,67, som er konkurrentivt med 0,75. Dette er spesielt gitt at systemet vårt er eit nullsatt system som krev ingen trening og minimal optimizering av parametrar. I tillegg til å beskriva systemet som er tilgjengeleg og diskutera implikasjonane av den relative suksessen av slike systemet på denne oppgåva, rapporterer vi også om andre, meir komplekse modeller vi eksperimenterte med.', 'pl': 'Uczestniczyliśmy w wspólnym zadaniu SemEval-2018 dotyczącym przechwytywania atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych (Zadanie 10) za pomocą prostego systemu, który zajął się ósmym miejscem wśród 26-zespołów, które wzięły udział w ocenie. Nasz ostateczny wynik to 0.67, który jest konkurencyjny ze zwycięskim wynikiem 0.75, zwłaszcza biorąc pod uwagę, że nasz system jest systemem zero-shot, który nie wymaga treningu i minimalnej optymalizacji parametrów. Oprócz opisu zgłoszonego systemu oraz omówienia implikacji względnego sukcesu takiego systemu w tym zadaniu, raportujemy również o innych, bardziej złożonych modelach, z którymi eksperymentowaliśmy.', 'mk': 'We participated to the SemEval-2018 shared task on capturing discriminative attributes (Task 10) with a simple system that ranked 8th amongst the 26 teams that took part in the evaluation.  Нашата последна оценка беше 0,67, што е конкурентно со победничката оценка од 0,75, особено со оглед на тоа што нашиот систем е систем со нула-пукање кој не бара обука и минимална оптимизација на параметрите. In addition to describing the submitted system, and discussing the implications of the relative success of such a system on this task, we also report on other, more complex models we experimented with.', 'lt': 'Dalyvavome bendroje SemEval-2018 užduotyje nustatyti diskriminacinius požymius (10 užduotis) taikant paprastą sistemą, kuri buvo 8-oji iš 26 vertinime dalyvavusių grupių. Our final score was 0.67, which is competitive with the winning score of 0.75, particularly given that our system is a zero-shot system that requires no training and minimal parameter optimisation.  Be pateiktos sistemos aprašymo ir santykinės tokios sistemos sėkmės šios užduoties pasekmių aptarimo, taip pat pranešame apie kitus, sudėtingesnius modelius, su kuriais eksperimentavome.', 'ro': 'Am participat la sarcina comună SemEval-2018 privind captarea atributelor discriminatorii (Sarcina 10) cu un sistem simplu care s-a clasat pe locul 8 în rândul celor 26 de echipe care au participat la evaluare. Scorul nostru final a fost de 0,67, ceea ce este competitiv cu scorul câștigător de 0,75, mai ales având în vedere că sistemul nostru este un sistem zero-shot care nu necesită antrenament și optimizare minimă a parametrilor. Pe lângă descrierea sistemului depus și discutarea implicațiilor succesului relativ al unui astfel de sistem asupra acestei sarcini, raportăm și alte modele mai complexe cu care am experimentat.', 'sr': 'Učestvovali smo u zajedničkom zadatku za pola Evala-2018 o uhvativanju diskriminacijskih atributa (zadatak 10) sa jednostavnim sistemom koji je postao 8. red među 26 timova koji su sudjelovali u procjeni. Naš poslednji rezultat je bio 0,67, što je konkurentno sa dobitnim rezultatom od 0,75, posebno s obzirom na to da je naš sistem sistem nula pucnjave koji ne zahteva obuku i minimalnu optimizaciju parametara. Pored opisa podignutog sistema i razgovora o implikacijama relativnog uspeha takvog sistema na ovom zadatku, takođe izvještavamo i o drugim, kompleksnijim modelima s kojima smo eksperimentirali.', 'si': 'අපි සේම්වේල් 2018 කාර්යයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වැඩකට සම්බන්ධ වැඩකරලා විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් අල්ලගන්න (වැඩක 10) සමඟ පද්ධතියෙන් 8වෙනි කණ අපේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරමාණය 0.67 කියලා, ඒක 0.75 විශේෂයෙන් ජයග්\u200dරහණය කරනවා, විශේෂයෙන්ම අපේ පද්ධතිය 0.67 විශේෂ පද්ධතියක් නැති ප්\u200dරශ මේ වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය පද්ධතිය විශ්වාස කරනවා, සහ මේ පද්ධතියේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා, අපි අනිත් විශ්වාස කරනවා, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කර', 'so': "Waxaannu ka qayb galnay shuqulkii SemEval-2018 oo ku saabsan qabsashada takoorida (Shaqo 10) iyo nidaam fudud oo ka mid ahaa kooxda 26 ee qiimeynta. Shahaadada ugu dambeeya waxay ahayd 0.67, taas oo u khilaafsan scorta guulaysan ee 0.75, si gaar ah in systemkeenu yahay nidaam zero oo aan u baahnayn waxbarasho iyo faa'iido ka yar parameter. Waxaa kale oo aan qoreynaa nidaamka la soo dhiibay oo aan ka sheekaynayno saameyaasha guulaysashada nidaamkan oo caynkaas ah, waxan sidoo kale wargelinaynaa tusaalooyin kale oo adag oo aan ku tijaabiyey.", 'sv': 'Vi deltog i SemEval-2018 delade uppgift om att fånga diskriminerande egenskaper (Uppgift 10) med ett enkelt system som rankade 8:e bland de 26 lag som deltog i utvärderingen. Vår slutpoäng var 0,67, vilket är konkurrenskraftigt med den vinnande poängen på 0,75, särskilt med tanke på att vårt system är ett nollskottssystem som kräver ingen träning och minimal parameteroptimering. Förutom att beskriva det inlämnade systemet, och diskutera konsekvenserna av ett sådant systems relativa framgång på denna uppgift, rapporterar vi också om andra, mer komplexa modeller vi experimenterade med.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் செம்வால்- 2018 வேலையில் பங்கிடப்பட்டுள்ளோம் வித்தியாசமான குணங்களை (பணி 10) எடுத்துக் கொள்ளும் மேலும் ஒரு சுலபமான அமைப்புடன் ஒரு சுல நமது இறுதி மதிப்பு 0.67 ஆகும். அது 0.75 வெற்றி மதிப்புடன் போராடும். குறிப்பாக எங்கள் அமைப்பு பூஜ்ஜியமாகும். பயிற்சி மற்றும் குறைந்த அளபுரு ஆசி கொடுக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பை விவரிப்பதைக் கூட மற்றும் இந்த முறைமையில் ஒரு சார்ந்த வெற்றியின் விளைவுகளைப் பற்றி விவாதம் செய்து, நாம் மற்ற', 'ur': 'ہم نے نصف Eval-2018 میں شریک کام کی ایک ساده سیسٹم کے ساتھ تقسیم کرنے کے بارے میں شریک کام کیا جو 26 ٹیموں میں شامل ہوا تھا۔ ہماری آخری اسکور 0.67 تھی، جو 0.75 کے غالب ہونے والی اسکور کے ساتھ مسابقه ہے، مخصوصا اس لئے کہ ہماری سیسٹم ایک صفر-شٹ سیسٹم ہے جو کوئی تطارین اور کم پارامیٹ optimization کی ضرورت نہیں ہے۔ ہم نے اس کام پر اس طرح کی نسبت موفقیت کے اثرات کی تعریف کے ساتھ اور اس طرح کی سٹم کے اثرات کی تعریف کے ساتھ، اور ہم نے دوسرے، بہت پیچیدہ موڈل کے بارے میں بھی گزارے ہیں جن سے ہم نے تجربہ کیا تھا.', 'uz': "Biz SemEval-2018 tashkilotlarini tashkilotga (Vazifa 10) ta'minlovchi shaxsiyatlarni qabul qilishga ega bo'lgan. Bu tashkilotni qiymatga ega bo'lgan 26 guruhdagi 8- chi guruhdagi oddiy tizimga ega bo'lgan. Bizning oxirgi scori 0.67 edi. Bu 0.75 yordamida yetarlicha bo'ladi. Shunday qilib, bizning tizimmiz tizimimizning 0.67 yolg'on tizimi emas, o'zimning minimal parametr optimiz kerak emas. In addition to describing the submitted system, and discussing the implications of the relative success of such a system on this task, we also report on other, more complex models we experimented with.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đã tham gia vào nhiệm vụ chia sẻ SemEvol về việc bắt giữ các thuộc tính nghi phạm (Task 10) với một hệ thống đơn giản xếp hạng thứ tám trong số 26 các đội đã tham gia đánh giá. Điểm số cuối cùng của chúng tôi là 0.67, đang cạnh tranh với tỉ số chiến thắng của 0.75, đặc biệt là hệ thống của chúng tôi không phải quay phim mà không cần huấn luyện và thu hoạch tối thiểu các tham số. Ngoài việc mô tả hệ thống được gửi đi, và thảo luận về tác động của một hệ thống tương đối thành công trong nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi còn báo cáo về những mẫu khác, phức tạp hơn chúng tôi thí nghiệm.', 'hr': 'Učestvovali smo u zajedničkom zadatku u polovini Eval-2018 o uključenju diskriminacijskih atributa (zadatak 10) s jednostavnim sustavom koji je bio 8. redak između 26 timova koji su učestvovali u procjeni. Naš konačni rezultat je bio 0,67, što je konkurentno sa pobjedničkim rezultatom od 0,75, posebno s obzirom na to da je naš sistem nulotvorni sustav koji ne zahtijeva nikakvu obuku i minimalnu optimizaciju parametara. Osim opisa podnosnog sustava i razgovora o posljedicama relativnog uspjeha takvog sustava na ovom zadatku, također prijavljamo i o drugim, složenijim modelima s kojima smo eksperimentirali.', 'nl': 'We namen deel aan de SemEval-2018 gedeelde taak over het vastleggen van discriminatieve attributen (Taak 10) met een eenvoudig systeem dat achtste werd onder de 26-teams die aan de evaluatie deelnamen. Onze eindscore was 0.67, wat concurreert met de winnende score van 0.75, vooral gezien het feit dat ons systeem een zero-shot systeem is dat geen training en minimale parameteroptimalisatie vereist. Naast het beschrijven van het ingediende systeem en het bespreken van de implicaties van het relatieve succes van een dergelijk systeem op deze taak, rapporteren we ook over andere, complexere modellen waarmee we geëxperimenteerd hebben.', 'bg': 'Участвахме в споделената задача за улавяне на дискриминационни атрибути (Задача 10) с проста система, която се класира на 8-о място сред 26-те отбора, участвали в оценката. Крайният ни резултат беше 0.67, което е конкурентно с печелившия резултат от 0.75, особено като се има предвид, че нашата система е система с нулев изстрел, която не изисква обучение и минимална оптимизация на параметрите. В допълнение към описанието на подадената система и обсъждането на последиците от относителния успех на такава система върху тази задача, докладваме и за други, по-сложни модели, с които експериментирахме.', 'da': 'Vi deltog i SemEval-2018 delte opgave om at indfange diskriminerende egenskaber (opgave 10) med et simpelt system, der rangerede 8. blandt de 26 hold, der deltog i evalueringen. Vores endelige score var 0,67, hvilket er konkurrencedygtigt med den vindende score på 0,75, især i betragtning af at vores system er et nulskudssystem, der ikke kræver træning og minimal parameteroptimering. Ud over at beskrive det indsendte system og diskutere konsekvenserne af et sådant systems relative succes på denne opgave, rapporterer vi også om andre, mere komplekse modeller, vi eksperimenterede med.', 'de': 'Wir haben an der gemeinsamen SemEval-2018-Aufgabe zur Erfassung diskriminierender Attribute (Task 10) mit einem einfachen System teilgenommen, das unter den 26-Teams, die an der Evaluation teilgenommen haben, den achten Platz belegt hat. Unser Endergebnis war 0.67, was mit der Siegerwertung von 0.75 konkurriert, zumal unser System ein Zero-Shot-System ist, das kein Training und minimale Parameteroptimierung erfordert. Neben der Beschreibung des eingereichten Systems und der Diskussion der Auswirkungen des relativen Erfolgs eines solchen Systems auf diese Aufgabe berichten wir auch über andere, komplexere Modelle, mit denen wir experimentiert haben.', 'id': 'Kami berpartisipasi di SemEval-2018 berbagi tugas untuk menangkap atribut diskriminatif (Tugas 10) dengan sistem sederhana yang menjadikan kedua delapan diantara 26 tim yang berpartisipasi dalam evaluasi. Our final score was 0.67, which is competitive with the winning score of 0.75, particularly given that our system is a zero-shot system that requires no training and minimal parameter optimisation.  Selain menggambarkan sistem yang dipanggil, dan mendiskusikan implikasi dari sukses relatif sistem seperti ini pada tugas ini, kami juga melaporkan tentang model yang lain, yang lebih kompleks yang kami eksperimen dengan.', 'ko': '우리는 간단한 시스템을 통해SemEval-2018의 식별 속성을 얻는 공유 임무(퀘스트 10)에 참여했고 이 시스템은 평가에 참여한 26개 팀 중 8위에 올랐다.우리의 최종 득점은 0.67인데 이것은 우승 득점 0.75와 경쟁력이 있다. 특히 우리의 시스템은 제로 사격 시스템이기 때문에 훈련과 최소한의 파라미터 최적화가 필요하지 않다.제출된 시스템을 설명하고 이 시스템이 이 임무에서 상대적으로 성공한 영향에 대해 토론하는 것 외에 우리는 우리가 실험한 다른 더 복잡한 모델도 보고했다.', 'fa': 'ما به وظیفه\u200cی تقسیم سال ۲۰۱۸ در مورد دستگیر کردن ویژگی\u200cهای جدا و جدا (کار ۱۰) با سیستم ساده\u200cای که در میان ۲۶ تیم\u200cها در ارزیابی شرکت می\u200cکردند شرکت کردیم. امتياز نهايي ما 0.67 بود که با امتياز برنده 0.75 مسابقه است، مخصوصا با توجه به اينکه سيستم ما سيستم شليک صفر است که هيچ آموزش و optimization پارامتر minimal نياز ندارد. علاوه بر توضیح سیستم تحویل داده شده و در مورد تأثیرات موفقیت نسبتی این سیستم در این کار، ما همچنین در مورد دیگر مدل های پیچیده تری که با آن آزمایش کردیم گزارش می دهیم.', 'tr': 'Biz SemEval-2018-nji ýylda çykyşlyk hasaplamak üçin diskriminçylyk hasaplamak üçin bir basit sisteme paýlaşdyk. Bu deňlenme üçin 26 toparda 8-nji derejä paýlaşdy. Biziň soňky notymyz 0.67 bolupdyr, bu 0.75 üstünlik notlary bilen laýyşykly. Özellikle biziň sistemimiziň 0.67 atly sistemidir, okuwçylygy we iň kiçi parametreler optimizasy gerekli däldir. Sahyp edilen sistemany tassyklamak we şol sistemiň ýagdaýynyň netijesini çözmek üçin, biz hem başga bir nusga deň karmaşık nusgalar bilen dowam edýäris.', 'sq': 'Ne morëm pjesë në detyrën e përbashkët SemEval-2018 për kapjen e atributeve diskriminuese (Detyra 10) me një sistem të thjeshtë që renditi të tetën midis 26 ekipave që morën pjesë në vlerësim. Punimi ynë përfundimtar ishte 0.67, e cila është konkurruese me rezultatin fitues 0.75, veçanërisht duke ditur se sistemi ynë është një sistem zero-shot që nuk kërkon trajnimi dhe optimizim minimal parametrash. In addition to describing the submitted system, and discussing the implications of the relative success of such a system on this task, we also report on other, more complex models we experimented with.', 'sw': 'Tumeshiriki katika jukumu la SemEval-2018 kuhusu kuchukua sifa za ubaguzi (Kazi 10) na mfumo rahisi uliokuwa na rangi ya nane kati ya timu 26 zilizoshiriki katika tathmini hiyo. Suala letu la mwisho lilikuwa 0.67, ambalo lina ushindani wa ushindi wa score 0.75, hasa kwa sababu mfumo wetu ni mfumo wa kutopigwa risasi sifuri ambalo hauna haja ya mafunzo na matumaini ya kidogo ya parameter. Zaidi ya kuelezea mfumo uliotolewa, na kujadili matokeo ya mafanikio makubwa ya mfumo wa aina hiyo kwenye kazi hii, tunaripoti pia kuhusu mifano mingine, mifano mingine yenye utata tuliyojaribu.', 'af': "Ons het gedeel by die SemEval-2018 deel taak op die opvang van diskriminasiewe eienskappe (Taak 10) met 'n eenvoudige stelsel wat 8de rang onder die 26 teame wat deel in die evaluasie geneem het. Ons eindelike telling was 0 In addition to describing the submitted system, and discussing the implications of the relative success of such a system on this task, we also report on other, more complex models we experimented with.", 'am': 'የሴmEval-2018 ስራዎችን (ስራ 10) በማግኘት ቀላል ስርዓት በተካፈሉት 26 ቡድን ውስጥ ስርዓት በተካፈሉት ቀላል ስርዓት ተካፈልን፡፡ የኋለኛው ደረጃችን 0.67 ነው፤ የ0.75 ደረጃን አሸንፋለች፡፡ የተዘጋጀውን ስርዓት ለመግለጽ እና የዚህን ስርዓት የቅርብ ስርዓት ግንኙነትን በማወቅ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৮ সালে অংশগ্রহণ করেছিলাম বৈষম্যের বৈষম্যের বৈষম্য (কাজ ১০) গ্রহণ করার ব্যাপারে একটি সাধারণ ব্যবস্থা যা এই মূল্যে অংশগ্রহণ করেছিল ২৬ আমাদের শেষ স্কোর ছিল ০. ৬৭, যা ০. ৭৫ এর বিজয়ী স্কোরের প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিদ্বন্দ্বিতা, বিশেষ করে যে আমাদের সিস্টেম একটি শুট ব্যবস্থা যা প্রশিক্ জমা দিয়েছে সিস্টেম বর্ণনা করার পরিবর্তে এবং এই কাজে এই ধরনের একটি সিস্টেমের আত্মিক সফলতার প্রভাব নিয়ে আলোচনা করার ব্যাপারে আমরা অন্যান্য প্রতি', 'hy': 'Մենք մասնակցեցինք 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ"-ի հանձնարարությանը, որն ընդունում է խտրականության առանձնահատկություններ (10-րդ հանձնարարությունը) մի պարզ համակարգի հետ, որը 8-րդ դասակարգում էր 26 թիմերից, որոնք մասնակցել էին գնահ Մեր վերջնական գնահատականը 0.67 էր, որը մրցակցում է 0.75 հաղթանակի գնահատականի հետ, հատկապես հաշվի առնելով, որ մեր համակարգը զրոյական կրակի համակարգ է, որն անհրաժեշտ է ոչ մի վարժեցման և միմինալ պարամետրե Ավելի քան ներկայացված համակարգի նկարագրությունը և քննարկելը նման համակարգի հաջողության հարաբերական հետևանքների մասին այս խնդրի վրա, մենք նաև զեկուցում ենք այլ, ավելի բարդ մոդելների մասին, որոնց հետ մենք փորձեցինք:', 'az': 'Biz yarısı-2018 paylaşdığımız görevlərə, müqayisədə bölüşdüyü 26 dəstədən 8-ci səf olan sadə bir sistem ilə ayırdıq. Bizim son nöqtələrimiz 0.67 idi, bu 0.75 nəticəsi ilə müqayisədir, əlbəttə ki, sistemimiz sıfır atış sistemidir ki, təhsil etmək və minimal parametr optimizasyonu istəməz. Təsdiq edilmiş sistemi təsdiqləmək və bu sistemin relatif başarısızlıqlarını bu işdə mübahisə etmək üçün, biz də başqa, daha kompleks modellərlə mübahisə edirik.', 'bs': 'Učestvovali smo u zajedničkom zadatku za pola Eval-2018 o uhvativanju diskriminacijskih atributa (zadatak 10) sa jednostavnim sistemom koji je postao 8. red među 26 timova koji su učestvovali u procjeni. Naš konačni rezultat je bio 0,67, koji je konkurentni sa pobjedničkim rezultatom od 0,75, posebno s obzirom na to da je naš sistem sistem nula pucnjave koji ne zahtijeva nikakvu obuku i minimalnu optimizaciju parametara. Uz opisivanje podnosnog sistema i razgovor o implikacijama relativnog uspjeha takvog sistema na ovom zadatku, također prijavljujemo i o drugim, složenijim modelima s kojima smo eksperimentirali.', 'ca': "Vam participar en la tasca compartida SemEval-2018 sobre capturar atributs discriminatoris (tasca 10) amb un sistema senzill que es classeva 8ª entre els 26 equips que van participar en l'evaluació. La nostra puntuació final va ser de 0,67, que és competitiu amb la puntuació guanyadora de 0,75, especialment tenint en compte que el nostre sistema és un sistema de fotografies zero que no necessita entrenament ni optimització mínima de paràmetres. A més de descriure el sistema submetit i discutir les implicacions de l'èxit relativ d'aquest sistema en aquesta tasca, també informem d'altres models més complexos amb els que experimentàvem.", 'cs': 'Podíleli jsme se na sdíleném úkolu SemEval-2018 o zachycení diskriminačních atributů (Úkol 10) s jednoduchým systémem, který se mezi 26 týmy, které se hodnocení zúčastnily, zařadil osmé místo. Naše konečné skóre bylo 0.67, což je konkurenční s vítězným skórem 0.75, zejména vzhledem k tomu, že náš systém je systém nulového střelu, který nevyžaduje žádný trénink a minimální optimalizaci parametrů. Kromě popisu předloženého systému a diskutování důsledků relativního úspěchu takového systému na tento úkol zpracováváme i další, složitější modely, se kterými jsme experimentovali.', 'fi': 'Osallistuimme SemEval-2018 jaettuun tehtävään erottavien attribuuttien keräämisestä (Tehtävä 10) yksinkertaisella järjestelmällä, joka sijoittui 8. sijalle arviointiin osallistuneiden 26 tiimin joukossa. Lopullinen tuloksemme oli 0,67, mikä kilpailee voittavan tuloksen kanssa 0,75, varsinkin kun järjestelmämme on nollashot järjestelmä, joka ei vaadi harjoittelua ja parametrien optimointia minimaalisesti. Sen lisäksi, että kuvaamme toimitettua järjestelmää ja keskustelemme tällaisen järjestelmän suhteellisen menestyksen vaikutuksista tähän tehtävään, raportoimme myös muista, monimutkaisemmista malleista, joilla olemme kokeilleet.', 'et': 'Osalesime SemEval-2018 jagatud ülesandel diskrimineerivate atribuutide kogumisel (ülesanne 10) lihtsa süsteemiga, mis oli hindamisel osalenud 26 meeskonna seas 8. kohal. Meie lõplik skoor oli 0,67, mis on konkurentsivõimeline võitnud skooriga 0,75, eriti arvestades, et meie süsteem on null-shot süsteem, mis ei vaja treeningut ja minimaalset parameetrite optimeerimist. Lisaks esitatud süsteemi kirjeldamisele ja sellise süsteemi suhtelise edu mõjude arutamisele sellele ülesandele anname aru ka teistest keerukamatest mudelitest, millega me katsetasime.', 'ha': "Mun yi rabo ga aikin SemEl-2018 da aka raba wani aikin da aka kãma halin takwai (aikin 10) da wani na'ura mai sauƙi wanda ya rana 8 cikin jama'a 26 suka yi rabo ga evalucin. Ganda na ƙarshen score ya kasance 0.67, wanda ke yin tsarin rabo na 0.75ke, hasa'a, da haske da cewa na'uranmu yana da tsarin sifilo wanda ba ta ƙayyade wani shirin da ke ƙaranci. In addition to describing the submitted system, and discussing the implications of the relative success of such a system on this task, we also report on other, more complex models we experimented with.", 'sk': 'Sodelovali smo na skupni nalogi SemEval-2018 o zajemanju diskriminativnih atributov (naloga 10) s preprostim sistemom, ki se je med 26 ekipami, ki so sodelovale pri ocenjevanju, uvrstil na 8. mesto. Naš končni rezultat je bil 0,67, kar je konkurenčno z zmagovalnim rezultatom 0,75, še posebej glede na to, da je naš sistem ničelni strel, ki ne zahteva treninga in minimalne optimizacije parametrov. Poleg opisa predloženega sistema in razprave o posledicah relativnega uspeha takega sistema na to nalogo poročamo tudi o drugih, bolj kompleksnih modelih, s katerimi smo eksperimentirali.', 'he': 'השתתפנו במשימה המשותפת של SemEval-2018 על תפיסת תכונות דיסקרטיביים (Task 10) עם מערכת פשוטה שדרגה 8 בין 26 הקבוצות שהשתתפו בהערכה. התוצאה הסופית שלנו הייתה 0.67, שהיא תחרותית עם התוצאה הניצחונית של 0.75, במיוחד בהתחשב במערכת שלנו היא מערכת אפס-ירי שאין צורך אימון ופרמטר מינימלי אופטימציה. בנוסף לתאר את המערכת המועברת, ולדיון על השלכות של הצלחה יחסית של מערכת כזו על המשימה הזאת, אנחנו גם מדווחים על דוגמנים אחרים, יותר מורכבים שניסינו איתם.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe Samebal-2008 séaké nggawe gerangkat cara-cara sing dibenakake Delwisik (task 10) karo sistem sing sampek tanggal 8-uwong sing wis antara cara-cara sing isin ning awak dhéwé cara-cara sing wis nguasai 30. Punika sing wis rampunga 0.1, sing paling nggambar 0.75, sing ngomong nik 0.75, dadi sing nyimpen sistem sing 0.0 Nambah nambah sistem sing nyimpen, lan ngrusak perusahaan seneng nggawe sistem sing nganggep nggawe barang nggawe barang iki dadi, awak dhéwé ngerasaye model sing apik, model sing komplikasi sing apik sing apik trus karo.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་SemEval-2018 དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་འགན་སྡུད་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་མང་པོ་ཞིག Our final score was 0.67, which is competitive with the winning score of 0.75, particularly given that our system is a zero-shot system that requires no training and minimal parameter optimisation. འོན་ཀྱང་། མ་ལག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་པ་དེ་ལ་བྱ་སྤྱོད་འདིའི་ནང་གི་མ་ལག་གི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ན་འོང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་ཞི'}
{'en': 'UMD at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Can Word Embeddings Capture Discriminative Attributes?', 'ar': 'UMD في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: هل يمكن لعروض Word Embeddings التقاط السمات التمييزية؟', 'es': 'UMD en SemEval-2018 Tarea 10: ¿Pueden las incrustaciones de palabras capturar atributos discriminativos?', 'pt': 'UMD no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Os Word Embeddings podem capturar atributos discriminativos?', 'fr': 'UMD au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 10\xa0: Les intégrations de mots peuvent-elles capturer des attributs discriminants\xa0?', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018タスク10のUMD ： Word Embeddingsは差別的な属性をキャプチャできますか？', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर UMD: Word Embeddings डिस्क्रिमिनेटिव विशेषताओं को कैप्चर कर सकते हैं?', 'zh': 'UMD at SemEval-2018 务 10:词嵌得否?', 'ru': 'UMD на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Могут ли вставки слов захватывать дискриминационные атрибуты?', 'ga': 'UMD ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: An féidir le Leabú Focal Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil?', 'ka': 'UMD semiEval-2018 Task 10: შეიძლება სიტყვების გარეშე დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების გარეშე?', 'hu': 'UMD a SemEval-2018 10. feladat: A szóbeágyazások megkülönböztető attribútumokat rögzíthetnek?', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Μπορούν οι ενσωματώσεις λέξεων να συλλάβουν διακριτικά χαρακτηριστικά;', 'mk': 'UMD at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Can Word Embeddings Capture Discriminative Attributes?', 'kk': 'UMD 10 тапсырмасының semiEval-2018 тапсырмасы: Сөздерді ендіру дискриминалды аттрибуттарды қабылдай алады ба?', 'lt': 'UMD SemEval-2018 10 užduotis: Ar žodžių įranga gali sugauti diskriminacinius požymius?', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10-ല്\u200d യുഎംഡി: വാക്കുകള്\u200d അംഗീകരിക്കുന്ന വ്യവസ്ഥകളെ പിടികൂടാന്\u200d പറ്റുമോ?', 'it': 'UMD a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Le incorporazioni di parole possono catturare attributi discriminatori?', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Word Embeddings Discriminate Attributes болох уу?', 'ms': 'UMD at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Can Word Embeddings Capture Discriminative Attributes?', 'no': 'UMD ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 10: Kan ordinnbygging henta diskriminate attributt?', 'ro': 'UMD la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Poate încorporările Word să capteze atribute discriminatorii?', 'pl': 'UMD w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Czy osadzenia słowa mogą przechwytywać dyskryminacyjne atrybuty?', 'sr': 'UMD na zadatku 10: Može li reèi ukljuèenja uhvatiti diskriminativne atribute?', 'sv': 'UMD på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Kan Word Embeddings fånga diskriminerande attribut?', 'so': 'UMD oo ku qoran SemEval-2018 Shaqada 10: Hadal Embeddings Ma qabsan karaa takooris?', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 10:', 'mt': 'UMD f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 10: L-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem tista’ taqbad attributi diskriminatorji?', 'si': 'UMD සම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 10: වචනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂතාව අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන්ද?', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Can Word Embeddings Capture Discriminate Attributes?', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifani 10:', 'vi': 'UMD ở Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task 10: Bắt bắt được tính năng riêng không?', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Могат ли вгражданията на думи да улавят дискриминационни атрибути?', 'hr': 'UMD na zadatku 10: Može li riječi uključenje uhvatiti diskriminativne atribute?', 'da': 'UMD på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Kan Word Embeddings fange diskriminatoriske attributter?', 'nl': 'UMD op SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Kunnen Word Embeddings discriminerende attributen vastleggen?', 'fa': 'UMD در ماموریت ۱۰ ۲۰۰۸: آیا استخراج کلمات ممکن است ویژه\u200cهای جدایی را بگیرد؟', 'de': 'UMD bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Können Word Embeddings diskriminierende Attribute erfassen?', 'tr': '5', 'sw': 'UMD kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 10: Je, Mazungumzo yanaweza kukamatwa na Attribu za Ubaguzi?', 'af': 'UMD by SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Kan Woord Inbettings Onderhou Discriminatiewe Attribute?', 'sq': 'UMD at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Can Word Embeddings Capture Discriminative Attributes?', 'am': 'UMD በSemEval-2018 ስራ 10:', 'ko': 'SemEval-18년 UMD의 작업 10: 단어 삽입은 구분적 속성을 포착할 수 있습니까?', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 10: Sözlük İçində Sözlüklər Diskriminat Özünü Yakalayabilir?', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ইউএমডি: শব্দ কি বৈষম্যিক বৈষম্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীকে গ্রেপ্তার করতে পারে?', 'bs': 'UMD na zadatku 10: Može li riječi uključenje uhvatiti diskriminativne atribute?', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք Word Embed-ները կարող են բռնել խտրականության առանձնահատկություններ:', 'cs': 'UMD na SemEval-2018 Úkol 10: Může slovní vložení zachytit diskriminační atributy?', 'et': 'UMD SemEval-2018 ülesanne 10: Kas sõnade manustamine suudab jäädvustada diskrimineerivaid atribuute?', 'fi': 'UMD SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Voiko sanaupotukset tallentaa syrjiviä attribuutteja?', 'id': 'UMD di SemEval-2018 Tugas 10: Bisakah Word Embeddings menangkap atribut diskriminatif?', 'ca': 'UMD a SemEval-2018 tasca 10: Poden les integracions de paraules capturar atributs discriminatoris?', 'jv': 'DNS', 'sk': 'UMD na SemEval-2018 naloga 10: Ali lahko besedne vdelave zajamejo diskriminativne atribute?', 'ha': '@ info', 'he': 'UMD ב SemEval-2018 משימה 10: האם תוכניות מילים יכולות לתפוס תוויות דיסקרמינציות?', 'bo': 'UMD ལོགས་ཉེན་ལྡན་གྱི་ལཱ་གཡོག་༡༠：ཡིག་གེ་སྦྱར་བཞག་ཡོད་པའི་བགོ་སྟངས་མང་ཆོག་འཆར་བྱེད་སྲིད་དམ།'}
{'en': 'We describe the University of Maryland’s submission to SemEval-018 Task 10, Capturing Discriminative Attributes : given word triples (w1, w2, d), the goal is to determine whether d is a discriminating attribute belonging to w1 but not w2. Our study aims to determine whether word embeddings can address this challenging task. Our submission casts this problem as supervised binary classification using only word embedding features. Using a gaussian SVM model trained only on validation data results in an F-score of 60 %. We also show that cosine similarity features are more effective, both in unsupervised systems (F-score of 65 %) and supervised systems (F-score of 67 %).', 'ar': 'نصف تقديم جامعة ماريلاند إلى SemEval-018 Task 10 ، "Capturing Discriminative Attributes": نظرًا لأن الكلمات تتضاعف ثلاث مرات (w1 ، w2 ، d) ، فإن الهدف هو تحديد ما إذا كانت d سمة تمييزية تنتمي إلى w1 وليس w2. تهدف دراستنا إلى تحديد ما إذا كانت حفلات الزفاف يمكن أن تعالج هذه المهمة الصعبة. يلقي تقديمنا هذه المشكلة على أنها تصنيف ثنائي خاضع للإشراف باستخدام ميزات تضمين الكلمات فقط. يؤدي استخدام نموذج SVM غاوسي المدرب فقط على بيانات التحقق إلى درجة F تبلغ 60٪. نظهر أيضًا أن ميزات تشابه جيب التمام أكثر فاعلية ، سواء في الأنظمة غير الخاضعة للإشراف (درجة F 65٪) والأنظمة الخاضعة للإشراف (درجة F 67٪).', 'fr': "Nous décrivons la soumission de l'Université du Maryland à SemeVal-018 Task 10, «\xa0Capturing Discriminative Attributes\xa0»\xa0: étant donné que le mot triple (w1, w2, d), l'objectif est de déterminer si d est un attribut discriminant appartenant à w1 mais non à w2. Notre étude vise à déterminer si les intégrations de mots peuvent répondre à cette tâche difficile. Notre soumission présente ce problème comme une classification binaire supervisée utilisant uniquement des fonctionnalités d'intégration de mots. L'utilisation d'un modèle SVM gaussien formé uniquement sur des données de validation donne un score F de 60\xa0%. Nous montrons également que les caractéristiques de similarité cosinus sont plus efficaces, à la fois dans les systèmes non supervisés (score F de 65\xa0%) et dans les systèmes supervisés (score F de 67\xa0%).", 'es': 'Describimos la presentación de la Universidad de Maryland a la Tarea 10 de SemEval-018, «Capturar atributos discriminativos»: dada la palabra se triplica (w1, w2, d), el objetivo es determinar si d es un atributo discriminatorio que pertenece a w1 pero no a w2. Nuestro estudio tiene como objetivo determinar si la inserción de palabras puede abordar esta difícil tarea. Nuestra presentación presenta este problema como clasificación binaria supervisada utilizando solo funciones de incrustación de palabras. El uso de un modelo de SVM gaussiano entrenado solo en datos de validación da como resultado una puntuación F del 60%. También mostramos que las características de similitud de coseno son más efectivas, tanto en sistemas no supervisados (puntuación F del 65%) como en sistemas supervisados (puntuación F del 67%).', 'pt': 'Descrevemos a submissão da Universidade de Maryland ao SemEval-018 Tarefa 10, “Capturando Atributos Discriminativos”: dados triplos de palavras (w1, w2, d), o objetivo é determinar se d é um atributo discriminativo pertencente a w1 mas não w2. Nosso estudo visa determinar se a incorporação de palavras pode resolver essa tarefa desafiadora. Nossa submissão lança esse problema como classificação binária supervisionada usando apenas recursos de incorporação de palavras. O uso de um modelo SVM gaussiano treinado apenas em dados de validação resulta em um F-score de 60%. Mostramos também que os recursos de similaridade de cosseno são mais eficazes, tanto em sistemas não supervisionados (F-score de 65%) quanto em sistemas supervisionados (F-score de 67%).', 'zh': '述马里兰大学SemEval-018事10,"获判属性":给定单词三元组(w1,w2,d),定d非w1而非w2也。 吾曹研指定词嵌,可以决此挑战性之任否。 我们提交将此事转换为仅用词嵌入功能的监督二元分类。 用但验数高斯 SVM 模,F 分为 60%。 又明余弦相似性特征于无监(F评分为65%)监(F评分为67%)中效。', 'hi': 'हम मैरीलैंड विश्वविद्यालय के SemEval-018 कार्य 10, "भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं पर कब्जा करने" के लिए प्रस्तुत करने का वर्णन करते हैं: दिए गए शब्द ट्रिपल (w1, w2, d), लक्ष्य यह निर्धारित करना है कि क्या d w1 से संबंधित एक भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषता है लेकिन w2 नहीं। हमारे अध्ययन का उद्देश्य यह निर्धारित करना है कि क्या शब्द एम्बेडिंग इस चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य को संबोधित कर सकते हैं। हमारा सबमिशन इस समस्या को केवल शब्द एम्बेडिंग सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके पर्यवेक्षित बाइनरी वर्गीकरण के रूप में डालता है। केवल सत्यापन डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित गाऊसी एसवीएम मॉडल का उपयोग करने से 60% का एफ-स्कोर होता है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि कोसाइन समानता विशेषताएं अधिक प्रभावी हैं, दोनों असुरक्षित प्रणालियों (65% के एफ-स्कोर) और पर्यवेक्षित प्रणालियों (67% के एफ-स्कोर) में।', 'ru': 'Мы описываем подчинение университета Мэриленда задаче 10 SemEval-018 «Захват дискриминационных атрибутов»: учитывая тройные значения слов (w1, w2, d), цель состоит в том, чтобы определить, является ли d дискриминационным атрибутом, принадлежащим w1, но не w2. Наше исследование направлено на определение того, могут ли вставки слов решить эту сложную задачу. Наша подача бросает эту проблему как контролируемую двоичную классификацию, используя только функции встраивания слов. Использование гауссовой модели виртуальной машины защиты, обученной только на валидационных данных, приводит к F-показателю 60%. Мы также показываем, что признаки сходства косинусов более эффективны как в неконтролируемых системах (F-показатель 65%), так и в контролируемых системах (F-показатель 67%).', 'ja': '私たちは、メリーランド大学がSemEval -018タスク10「差別的属性の捕捉」に提出したものについて説明しています：与えられた単語三重（ w 1、w 2、d ）では、dがw 1に属するがw 2に属しない差別的属性であるかどうかを判断することを目標としています。私たちの研究は、単語埋め込みがこの困難な課題に対処できるかどうかを判断することを目的としています。当社の提出物は、単語埋め込み機能のみを使用して、この問題を監視されたバイナリ分類としてキャストします。検証データのみで訓練されたガウスSVMモデルを使用すると、60%のFスコアが得られます。我々はまた、コサイン類似性特徴が、無監督システム（ ６ ５ ％のＦスコア）及び監視システム（ ６ ７ ％のＦスコア）の両方においてより効果的であることを示す。', 'ga': 'Déanaimid cur síos ar aighneacht Ollscoil Maryland chuig Tasc 10 SemEval-018, “Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha a Ghabháil”: nuair a chuirtear trí fhocail (w1, w2, d) san áireamh, is é an sprioc a chinneadh an tréith idirdhealaitheach é d a bhaineann le w1 ach nach w2. Tá sé mar aidhm ag ár staidéar a dhéanamh amach an féidir le neadú focal dul i ngleic leis an tasc dúshlánach seo. Caitheann ár n-aighneacht an fhadhb seo mar aicmiú dénártha maoirsithe ag baint úsáide as gnéithe leabaithe focal amháin. Ag baint úsáide as samhail SVM Gaiéiseach oilte ar thorthaí sonraí bailíochtaithe amháin i scór F de 60%. Léirímid freisin go bhfuil gnéithe cosúlachta cósine níos éifeachtaí, i gcórais gan mhaoirseacht (scór-F 65%) agus i gcórais faoi mhaoirseacht (scór-F de 67%).', 'el': "Περιγράφουμε την υποβολή του Πανεπιστημίου του Μέριλαντ στο SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes': δεδομένου ότι η λέξη τριπλασιάζει (w1, w2, d), ο στόχος είναι να καθοριστεί εάν το είναι ένα διακριτικό χαρακτηριστικό που ανήκει στο w1 αλλά όχι στο w2. Η μελέτη μας έχει ως στόχο να προσδιορίσει αν η ενσωμάτωση λέξεων μπορεί να αντιμετωπίσει αυτό το δύσκολο έργο. Η υποβολή μας θέτει αυτό το πρόβλημα ως εποπτευόμενη δυαδική ταξινόμηση χρησιμοποιώντας μόνο χαρακτηριστικά ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Η χρήση ενός γασσικού μοντέλου SVM εκπαιδευμένου μόνο σε δεδομένα επικύρωσης οδηγεί σε βαθμολογία F 60%. Επίσης, καταδεικνύουμε ότι τα χαρακτηριστικά ομοιότητας του συνημίου είναι πιο αποτελεσματικά, τόσο σε συστήματα χωρίς επίβλεψη (βαθμολογία 65%) όσο και σε εποπτευόμενα συστήματα (βαθμολογία 67%).", 'ka': 'ჩვენ მარილანდის სამუშაო სამუშაო-018 რაოდენობისთვის გამოსახულებას აღწერებთ 10-ზე, "დისკრიმიმინატიური ატრიბუტების გამოსახულება" (w1, w2, d), მიზეზი არის განსახულება, რომ d არის დისკრიმინაციური ატრიბუტი w1-ზე,  ჩვენი სწავლების მიზეზი განსაზღვრება თუ სიტყვების შესაძლებელია ამ შესაძლებელი დავალება. ჩვენი წარმოდგენება ამ პრობლემას გადასრულებული ბინარი კლასიფიკაციის გამოყენება მხოლოდ სიტყვების შესახებ. Gaussian SVM მოდელის გამოყენება, რომელიც განაკეთებულია მხოლოდ განაკეთებული მონაცემების შემდეგ F- score 60%-ის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ კოსინური სინამდვილეობის ფუნქციები უფრო ეფექტიურია, რომელიც არ განსხვავებული სისტემებში (65%) F-score და დანახვავებული სისტემებში (67%).', 'hu': 'Leírjuk a Maryland Egyetem beadványát a SemEval-018 Task 10, "Megkülönböztető attribútumok rögzítése": adott szó háromszoros (w1, w2, d), a cél annak meghatározása, hogy d egy megkülönböztető attribútum, amely w1, de nem w2. Tanulmányunk célja annak megállapítása, hogy a szóbeágyazások képesek-e megoldani ezt a kihívást jelentő feladatot. Beküldésünk ezt a problémát felügyelt bináris osztályozásként veti fel, csak szóbeágyazási funkciókat használva. A kizárólag validálási adatokra képzett gaussz SVM modell használata 60%-os F-pontszámot eredményez. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy a koszinusz hasonlósági jellemzők hatékonyabbak mind a felügyelet nélküli rendszerekben (65%-os F pontszám), mind a felügyelet nélküli rendszerekben (67%-os F pontszám).', 'kk': 'Біз Мариландың университетінің 30- Eval- 018 тапсырмасына "дискриминациялық аттрибуттарды түсіру" дегенді таңдадық: үш сөз (w1, w2, d), мақсатты d - w1 дегенге қатынастығы дискриминациялық атрибутты анықтау, бірақ w2 емес. Біздің зерттеулеріміз сөздерді ендіру үшін осы шақыру тапсырманы шешуге болады. Біздің жіберіміз бұл мәселеді тек сөзді ендіру мүмкіндіктерімен басқару үшін бинарлық классификациясы болады. Гауссиялық SVM үлгісін тек тексеру деректерінің F- нәтижесін 60% деп қолданылады. Сонымен қатар, косинус ұқсас мүмкіндіктері көтерілмеген жүйелерде (65%) және басқару жүйелерде (67%) дегенді көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Mes apibūdiname Marylando universiteto pateiktą paraišką SemEval-018 10 uždaviniui „Gauti diskriminacinius požymius“: atsižvelgiant į žodį trigubai (w1, w2, d), tikslas yra nustatyti, ar d yra diskriminacinis požymis, priklausantis w1, bet ne w2. Mūsų tyrimu siekiama nustatyti, ar žodžių įtraukimas gali spręsti šią sunkią užduotį. Our submission casts this problem as supervised binary classification using only word embedding features.  Naudojant gauzinį SVM model į, apmokytą tik patvirtinimo duomenimis, gaunamas 60 % F balas. Taip pat rodome, kad kosino panašumo požymiai yra veiksmingesni tiek nepastebimose sistemose (65 % F balas) ir prižiūrimose sistemose (67 % F balas).', 'ms': "Kami menggambarkan penghantaran Universiti Maryland kepada SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes': diberikan perkataan tiga (w1, w2, d), tujuan adalah untuk menentukan sama a d a d adalah atribut diskriminasi yang milik w1 tetapi bukan w2. Ujian kami bertujuan untuk menentukan sama ada penyambungan perkataan boleh mengatasi tugas mencabar ini. Our submission casts this problem as supervised binary classification using only word embedding features.  Penggunaan model SVM gaussian dilatih hanya pada data pengesahihan menghasilkan skor F 60%. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa ciri-ciri persamaan kosinus lebih efektif, kedua-dua dalam sistem tidak diawasi (skor F 65%) dan sistem yang diawasi (skor F 67%).", 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മേരില്ലാന്\u200dഡിന്\u200dറെ യൂണിവേഴ്സിറ്റിയിലേക്ക് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 018 ടാസ്കിന്\u200dറെ കീഴ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊടുക്കുന്നത് വിവരിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൊടുത്തിരിക്കുന്നു( നമ്മുടെ പഠനത്തിന്റെ ഉദ്ദേശം ഈ വാക്ക് അകത്തുകടക്കുന്നത് വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഈ വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ജോലി വി നമ്മുടെ കീഴ്പ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ബൈനറി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d മാത്രം വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മാത്രം നിരീക്ഷി ഗാസ്സിയന്\u200d SVM മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ശരിയാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡേറ്റാകള്\u200d മാത്രമാണ് ഒരു F- സ്കോര്\u200d 60%. കോസിന്റെ തുല്യമായ പ്രവണങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്നും കാണിക്കുന്നു. സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d (65 ശതമാനത്തില്\u200d F സ്', 'it': "Descriviamo la sottomissione dell'Università del Maryland al SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes': data parola tripla (w1, w2, d), l'obiettivo è determinare se d è un attributo discriminante appartenente a w1 ma non w2. Il nostro studio mira a determinare se le incorporazioni di parole possono affrontare questo compito impegnativo. La nostra presentazione getta questo problema come classificazione binaria supervisionata utilizzando solo funzioni di incorporazione di parole. Utilizzando un modello SVM gaussiano addestrato solo sui dati di convalida si ottiene un punteggio F del 60%. Mostriamo anche che le caratteristiche di somiglianza coseno sono più efficaci, sia nei sistemi non supervisionati (punteggio F del 65%) che nei sistemi supervisionati (punteggio F del 67%).", 'mt': "We describe the University of Maryland's submission to SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes': given word triples (w1, w2, d), the goal is to determine whether d is a discriminating attribute belonging to w1 but not w2.  Our study aims to determine whether word embeddings can address this challenging task.  Our submission casts this problem as supervised binary classification using only word embedding features.  Using a gaussian SVM model trained only on validation data results in an F-score of 60%.  We also show that cosine similarity features are more effective, both in unsupervised systems (F-score of 65%) and supervised systems (F-score of 67%).", 'no': "Vi beskriver University of Maryland's submission to semiEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturing Discriminate Attributes': given word triples (w1, w2, d), målet er å bestemme om d er ein diskriminate attributt tilhøyrer w1, men ikkje w2. Studeret vårt mål å bestemme om ordinnbygging kan adressera denne vanskeleg oppgåva. Dette opplysningen viser problemet som oversikt binærklassifikasjon med berre ord innebæringsfunksjonar. Bruk ein gaussisk SVM-modell som berre treng på validasjonsdata i eit F-score med 60%. Vi viser også at kosinuslingsfunksjonar er meir effektive, både i ulike systemer (F-score of 65%) og oversikte systemer (F-score of 67%).", 'mn': 'Бид Мариландын Их Сургуулийн SemEval-018 Task 10-д "Discriminate Attributes" гэдэг зүйлийг тайлбарлаж байна: 3 үг (w1, w2, d), зорилго гэвэл d нь w1-тэй хамааралтай ялгаатай харилцаа гэдгийг тодорхойлох зорилго юм. Бидний судалгааны зорилго нь энэ шаардлагатай ажлыг зохицуулж чадах эсэхийг тодорхойлдог. Бидний хүлээн зөвхөн үг нэвтрүүлэх чадварыг ашиглан энэ асуудлыг хоёр дахь хуваалцаа гэж үздэг. Гассийн SVM загварыг ашиглах нь зөвхөн шийдвэрлэх өгөгдлийн үр дүнг нь F-тоо 60%-той болно. Мөн бид косины төстэй харьцуулалт нь илүү үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хоёулаа батлаагүй системд (F-score of 65%) болон удирдагдсан системд (F-score of 67%) байдаг.', 'pl': "Opisujemy zgłoszenie przez Uniwersytet Maryland do SemEval-018 Zadania 10, 'Przechwytywanie atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych': podane słowo trzykrotnie (w1, w2, d), celem jest ustalenie, czy d jest atrybut dyskryminujący należący do w1, ale nie w2. Nasze badanie ma na celu określenie, czy osadzenia słów mogą sprostać temu trudnemu zadaniu. Nasze zgłoszenie postrzega ten problem jako nadzorowaną klasyfikację binarną przy użyciu tylko funkcji osadzania słów. Korzystanie z gauskiego modelu SVM przeszkolonego tylko na danych walidacyjnych powoduje wynik F 60%. Pokazujemy również, że cechy podobieństwa cosinusów są bardziej skuteczne, zarówno w systemach bez nadzoru (wynik F 65%) jak i systemach nadzorowanych (wynik F 67%).", 'sr': 'Mi opisujemo podnošenje Univerziteta Maryland a na zadatak 10, uloženje diskriminacijskih atributa: određene reči trostruko (w1, w2, d), cilj je utvrditi je li d diskriminacijski atribut pripada w1, ali ne w2. Naša studija je cilj da utvrdi da li se uključivanje reči može riješiti ovom izazovnom zadatku. Naša podnošljenja predstavlja ovaj problem kao nadzorna binarna klasifikacija, koristeći samo reč uključujući karakteristike. Koristeći gausijski SVM model obučen samo na rezultatima podataka o validaciji u F-rezultatu od 60%. Takođe pokazujemo da su karakteristike sličnosti kosina učinkovitije, i u nepotrebnim sistemima (F-rezultat od 65%) i nadgledanim sistemima (F-rezultat od 67%).', 'ro': "Descriem depunerea Universității din Maryland la SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii': dat cuvântul triplu (w1, w2, d), scopul este de a determina dacă d este un atribut discriminatoriu aparținând w1, dar nu w2. Studiul nostru își propune să determine dacă încorporările de cuvinte pot aborda această sarcină dificilă. Depunerea noastră prezintă această problemă ca clasificare binară supravegheată folosind doar caracteristici de încorporare a cuvintelor. Utilizarea unui model SVM gausac instruit numai pe datele de validare rezultă într-un scor F de 60%. De asemenea, demonstrăm că caracteristicile similarității cosene sunt mai eficiente, atât în sistemele nesupravegheate (scorul F de 65%) cât și în sistemele supravegheate (scorul F de 67%).", 'si': 'Name අපේ පරීක්ෂණාව හදන්නේ වචන සම්බන්ධයක් මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා තීරණය කරන්න. අපේ පිළිගන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ බායිනාරි විශ්වාසයෙන් ව ගුසියාන් SVM මොඩල් භාවිතා විතරයි F- score 60% විතරයි පරිශ්චා කරලා තියෙන්නේ. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කෝසින් වගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවට වඩා ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශේෂතාවක් වගේ, නැති පද්ධතිය (F-score of 65%) සහ පද්ධතිය (F-', 'sv': 'Vi beskriver University of Marylands bidrag till SemEval-018 Task 10, "Capturing Discriminative Attributes": givet ord tredubblar (w1, w2, d), målet är att avgöra om d är ett diskriminerande attribut som tillhör w1 men inte w2. Vår studie syftar till att avgöra om ordinbäddningar kan hantera denna utmanande uppgift. Vår inlämning kastar detta problem som övervakad binär klassificering med endast ord inbäddning funktioner. Att använda en gaussisk SVM-modell som endast tränas på valideringsdata ger ett F-poäng på 60%. Vi visar också att cosinus likhet funktioner är mer effektiva, både i obevakade system (F-poäng på 65%) och övervakade system (F-poäng på 67%).', 'so': "Waxaynu sawiraynaa warqadda jaamacadda Maryland ee loo soo diro SemEval-018 Shaqadda 10, 'Qabsasha sinnaanta attribute': hadal la siiyay (w1, w2, d), goalku waa in la caddeeyo in ad tahay xuquuqda takoorista ee w1 laakiin aan w2 ahayn. Our study aims to determine whether word embeddings can address this challenging task.  Madaxalkayagu wuxuu dhibaatadan u soo saaraa sida mid la ilaaliyo fasax labaad oo kaliya oo kaliya hadal ku qoran. Isku isticmaalaya muusikada SVM oo kaliya oo lagu tababaray macluumaadka xaqiijinta waxaa laga soo jeedaa kooxda F-score 60%. We also show that cosine similarity features are more effective, both in unsupervised systems (F-score of 65%) and supervised systems (F-score of 67%).", 'ta': "நாம் மேரில்லாந்தின் கல்வியூரியில் செம்Eval- 018 பணிக்கு பதில் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் 'கைத்துப்பிடிக்கும் discriminatory குணங்கள்': கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகள் (w1, w2, d), d யு எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி இந்த சவால் செய்யும் வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுமா என்பதை தீர்மானிக்க வேண்டும். எங்கள் உத்தரவு இந்த பிரச்சனையை இருநிலை வகைப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது மட்டும் வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் குணங்களை பயன் ஒரு கேஸ்சியன் SVM மாதிரி பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது செலுத்துதல் தரவு மட்டும் 60% புள்ளியின் F- score results. பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத அமைப்புகளில் இருந்தும் கோசைன் ஒற்றை குணங்கள் மிகவும் செயல்படுகிறது மற்றும் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத முறைமைகளில் (F- scor", 'mk': 'Ја опишуваме поднесувањето на Универзитетот во Мериленд на SemEval-018 задача 10 „Фаќање дискриминативни атрибути“: со оглед на зборот трипати (w1, w2, d), целта е да се одреди дали d е дискриминативен атрибут кој припаѓа на w1, но не w2. Our study aims to determine whether word embeddings can address this challenging task.  Нашето поднесување го фрла овој проблем како надгледувана бинарна класификација користејќи само карактеристики на вградување на зборови. Користењето гасиски СВМ модел обучен само на податоци за валидација резултира со F-оценка од 60 отсто. Исто така покажуваме дека карактеристиките на косинската сличност се поефикасни, како во ненадгледуваните системи (F-оценка од 65 отсто) и во надгледуваните системи (F-оценка од 67 отсто).', 'ur': 'ہم مریلند کے یونیورسیٹ کی نسبت SemEval-018 ٹاکس 10 کی نسبت توصیف کرتے ہیں، "دیسکریمیٹ آبریٹ کاپیٹ کرنا": ہمارے مطالعہ کا مطالعہ ہے کہ مقرر کرنا چاہے کہ کلمات ابڈینگ اس مشکل کام کے بارے میں استعمال کرسکے۔ ہماری اطاعت اس مسئلہ کو صرف واحد انڈینگ ویٹیوں کے استعمال کے طور پر supervised binary classification بنا رہا ہے. ایک گاوسی SVM موڈل کی استعمال کرتی ہے جو صرف ویلڈیٹ ڈیٹا کے نتیجے 60% کی F- اسکور میں تطابق کی گئی ہے. ہم نے بھی دکھایا ہے کہ کاسین برابری کے فرصت زیادہ اثر ہیں، دونوں ناپابندی سیستموں میں (F-score of 65%) اور supervised سیستموں میں (F-score of 67%).', 'uz': 'Biz Marylanding Universitetga SemEval-018 Vazifa 10, "Diqqat atributlarni qabul qilish" - so\'z uchta so\'zlar (w1, w2, d) aylanadigan maqsadi, u w1, w2 bo\'lgan ajratish imkoniyatini aniqlash. Bizning o\'qituvchimiz shu murakkab vazifani boshqarishini aniqlashga ega. Bu muammolarni faqat qo\'yish imkoniyatlaridan foydalanish uchun boshqa bir marta darajasida boshqaruvchi darajasida bajaradi. Name Kosining xil xususiyatlarini ko\'rsatishimiz mumkin, saqlab qolmagan tizimlarda (65%) va taʼminlovchi tizimlar (67%) bilan boshqarilmagan F score.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi mô tả việc Đại học của Maryland được tham gia vào nhiệm vụ Semkhai-08 "Bắt giữ các thuộc tính riêng lẻ" (w1, w2, d). Nghiên cứu của chúng tôi nhằm xác định liệu sự ghép nối từ có thể giải quyết thử thách này. Việc đệ trình của chúng tôi chọn vấn đề này là mật khẩu nhị phân được giám sát chỉ dùng các tính năng: Sử dụng một mô hình SVM Gauss được đào tạo chỉ trên dữ liệu thống trị kết quả là F-số của 60. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy khả năng sánh bằng cosin có hiệu quả hơn, cả trong hệ thống không giám sát (F-số của 65=) và hệ thống được giám sát (F-số của 67=).', 'bg': 'Описваме подчинението на Университета в Мериленд на задача 10 "улавяне на дискриминационни атрибути": дадена дума тройно (w1, w2, d), целта е да се определи дали d е дискриминационен атрибут, принадлежащ на w1, но не w2. Нашето изследване има за цел да определи дали вграждането на думи може да се справи с тази предизвикателна задача. Нашето подаване хвърля този проблем като контролирана двоична класификация, използвайки само функции за вграждане на думи. Използването на гауски SVM модел, обучен само върху валидиране на данни, води до F-score от 60%. Показваме също, че характеристиките на косинусовата сходство са по-ефективни както при ненадзорни системи (оценка 65%), така и при надзорни системи (оценка 67%).', 'nl': "We beschrijven de inzending van de Universiteit van Maryland aan SemEval-018 Taak 10, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes': gegeven woord drievoudig (w1, w2, d), is het doel om te bepalen of d een onderscheidend kenmerk is dat behoort tot w1 maar niet tot w2. Ons onderzoek heeft als doel te bepalen of woord embeddings deze uitdagende taak kan aanpakken. Onze indiening beschouwt dit probleem als supervised binaire classificatie met behulp van alleen woord embedding functies. Het gebruik van een gaussisch SVM-model dat alleen is getraind op validatiegegevens resulteert in een F-score van 60%. We tonen ook aan dat cosinusvergelijkeniskenmerken effectiever zijn, zowel in systemen zonder toezicht (F-score van 65%) als in systemen met toezicht (F-score van 67%).", 'hr': 'Mi opisujemo podnošenje Univerziteta Maryland a na zadatak 10, podnošenje diskriminacijskih atributa: dati riječi trostruko (w1, w2, d), cilj je utvrditi je li d diskriminacijski atribut pripada w1, ali ne w2. Naša istraživanja je cilj utvrditi mogu li se uključiti riječi o ovom izazovnom zadatku. Naša podnošljenja razmatra ovaj problem kao nadzirana binarna klasifikacija koristeći samo riječ uključujući funkcije. Koristeći gausijski SVM model koji je obučen samo na validacijskim podacima rezultat rezultata F-rezultata od 60%. Također pokazujemo da su karakteristike sličnosti kosina učinkovitije, kako u nepotrebnim sustavima (F-rezultat od 65%) i nadziranim sustavima (F-rezultat od 67%).', 'de': "Wir beschreiben die Einreichung der University of Maryland an SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes': Wenn das Wort verdreifacht wird (w1, w2, d), soll festgestellt werden, ob d ein diskriminierendes Attribut ist, das zu w1 gehört, aber nicht zu w2. Ziel unserer Studie ist es herauszufinden, ob Worteinbettungen diese herausfordernde Aufgabe bewältigen können. In unserer Einreichung wird dieses Problem als überwachte binäre Klassifizierung mit nur Wort-Einbettungsfunktionen betrachtet. Die Verwendung eines gaussischen SVM-Modells, das nur auf Validierungsdaten trainiert wurde, ergibt einen F-Score von 60%. Wir zeigen auch, dass Cosinus Ähnlichkeitsmerkmale effektiver sind, sowohl in unbeaufsichtigten Systemen (F-Score von 65%) als auch in überwachten Systemen (F-Score von 67%).", 'ko': "우리는 마리란 대학이Sem Eval-018 퀘스트 10에 제출한'포획 구분 속성'을 묘사했다. 단어 3원조(w1, w2, d)를 정하고 목표는 d가 w2의 구분 속성이 아닌 w1에 속하는지 확인하는 것이다.우리의 연구는 단어 삽입이 이 도전적인 임무를 해결할 수 있는지 확인하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.우리의 의견은 이 문제를 단어 삽입 기능만 사용하는 감독 이원 분류로 귀결시켰다.검증 데이터 훈련에만 기반한 고스 지원 벡터 모델을 사용하면 F 점수가 60%이다.여현의 유사성 특징은 무감독시스템(F점수 65%)과 유감독시스템(F점수 67%)에서 더욱 효과적이라는 것을 보여준다.", 'id': "Kami menggambarkan pengiriman Universitas Maryland ke SemEval-018 Tugas 10, 'Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif': diberikan kata tiga kali (w1, w2, d), tujuan adalah untuk menentukan apakah d adalah atribut diskriminatif milik w1 tetapi bukan w2. Ujian kami bermaksud untuk menentukan apakah pembangunan kata dapat mengatasi tugas yang menantang ini. Pengiriman kami melemparkan masalah ini sebagai klasifikasi binari yang diawasi menggunakan hanya ciri-ciri penyambungan kata. Menggunakan model SVM gausi yang dilatih hanya pada data validasi hasilnya adalah skor F 60%. We also show that cosine similarity features are more effective, both in unsupervised systems (F-score of 65%) and supervised systems (F-score of 67%).", 'fa': 'ما تحویل دانشگاه ماریلند را به دستور ۱۰ در نیم Eval-018 توصیف می\u200cکنیم، «تحویل اختلاعات جدایی\u200c\u200cکننده\u200c»: (w1, w2, d)، هدف این است که تصمیم بگیریم آیا d ویژه جدایی\u200cکننده\u200cای از w1 است ولی نه w2. مطالعه\u200cی ما هدف دارد تا تعیین کند که آیا کلمه\u200cهای ابتدایی می\u200cتوانند این کار مشکل را حل کنند. تسلیم کردن ما این مشکل را به عنوان مختصات دوگانی تحت نظر قرار می دهد با استفاده از تنها ویژگی\u200cهای تسلیم کردن کلمه. استفاده از یک مدل SVM گاوسی آموزش داده شده تنها در نتیجه داده\u200cهای تایید در حدود ۶۰ درصد نتیجه\u200cای F است. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که ویژگی\u200cهای شبیه\u200cسازی کوسین موثر\u200cتر هستند، هر دو در سیستم\u200cهای غیرقابل تحت تأثیر قرار گرفته\u200cاند (F-score of 65%) و سیستم\u200cهای تحت نظر (F-score of 67%).', 'sw': "Tunaelezea ujumbe wa Chuo Kikuu cha Maryland kwa ajili ya SemEval-018 kazi 10, 'Kukamata Tamko za Ubaguzi': matatizo yaliyotolewa maneno (w1, w2, d), lengo ni kuamua ikiwa ni mtazamo wa kubagua wa w1 lakini sio w2. Utafiti wetu unakusudia kuamua kama maneno yanaweza kuhusiana na kazi hii ya changamoto. Ujumbe wetu unatupa tatizo hili kama utangazaji wa mbili kwa kutumia maneno pekee yanayoingia. Kwa kutumia muundo wa SVM wa Gaussia ulifundishwa pekee kwa taarifa zilizothibitishwa matokeo ya F-score ya asilimia 60. Tunaonyesha pia kuwa vipengele vya kosini vina ufanisi zaidi, wote katika mfumo usio na uhakika (F-score wa asilimia 65) na mifumo inayofuatiliwa (vipimo vya F-score vya asilimia 67).", 'sq': "We describe the University of Maryland's submission to SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes': given word triples (w1, w2, d), the goal is to determine whether d is a discriminating attribute belonging to w1 but not w2.  Our study aims to determine whether word embeddings can address this challenging task.  Përdorimi ynë e hedh këtë problem si klasifikim binar mbikqyrur duke përdorur vetëm karakteristikat e përfshirjes së fjalëve. Using a gaussian SVM model trained only on validation data results in an F-score of 60%.  We also show that cosine similarity features are more effective, both in unsupervised systems (F-score of 65%) and supervised systems (F-score of 67%).", 'am': "የምርላንድ ዩንቨርስቲ ለሴmEval-018 ስራ 10፣ 'የውስደትን መያዝ': የተሰጠ ቃላት (w1፣ w2፣ d) መክፈት w1 ነገር ግን w2 ያልሆነው የተለየ ውጤት መሆኑን ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ ትምህርታችን የንግግር አካባቢዎች የዚህን የጥቅልቅ ስራ ማግኘት እንዲችል መግለጫ ነው፡፡ አዋጅ የደረሰን ጉዳይነታችን በሀብት መፍታት ብቻ ቃላትን በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s እናም ብጤያቸው ስርዓቶች፣ በተጠበቀው ስርዓቶች (F-score 65 በመቶ) እና በተጠበቀው ስርዓቶች (F-score 67 በመቶ)፡", 'af': "Ons beskryf die Universiteit van Maryland se onderskrywing aan SemEval-018 Opdrag 10, 'Opneem diskriminasiewe eienskappe': gegewe woord tripels (w1, w2, d), die doel is om te bepaal of d 'n diskriminasieële eienskap behoort aan w1 maar nie w2 nie. Ons studie doel om te bepaal of woord inbettings hierdie pragtige taak kan adres. Ons ondersoek gooi hierdie probleem as ondersoekte binêre klasifikasie deur slegs woord inbêring funksies te gebruik. Gebruik van 'n gaussie SVM model wat slegs onderrig is op geldigheidsdata resultate in' n F- score van 60%. NAME OF TRANSLATORS Ons wys ook dat kosinis gelykenis funksies meer effektief is, beide in ononderwerpende stelsels (F-score of 65%) en superviseerde stelsels (F-score of 67%).", 'tr': "Biz Marylandyň Uniwersitetiniň SemEval-018 Görevi 10'a 'Diskrimiýat Hassasyny Capturing': berilen s özler üç (w1, w2, d), maksady, d-iň w1-ne degişli diskrimiýat hassasynyň d äldigini bejermek. Biziň araşdyrymyz sözleriň içinde bu kynçylykly zada çözmesini çözmek üçin maksady. Biziň ilatymyz bu meseleni bejerilmiş ikili klasifikasyýa diňe sözleri ekleýän özellikleri ullanýar. % Biz hem kosinuň ýakynlaşyk özellikleri hem daşyrlyk sistemlerde (F-score of 65%) we kontrol edilen sistemlerde (F-score of 67%) täsirlidir.", 'az': 'Biz Maryland Üniversitesinin halı-018 Gözəli 10\'a təsdiqlənməsini təsdiqləyirik: "Diskriminat Attributlarını yakalamaq" (w1, w2, d), məqsəd d\'in w1\'ə ait müxtəlif bir təsdiqliyi müəyyən edilməsidir, amma w2 deyildir. Bizim təcrübəmiz bu çətin işlərini çəkmək üçün sözlərin istifadə edilməsini təsdiqləmək istəyir. Bizim təkzibimiz bu problemi ancaq sözləri içərisində yazılmış xüsusiyyətlər vasitəsilə gözləyirlər. Gaussian SVM modeli istifadə edilən təhsil verilən verilənlərin sonuçlarını F-score 60%-dən istifadə edir. Biz də kosinun bənzəri özellikləri daha etkilidir, hər ikisi də müəyyən edilməmiş sistemlərdə (F-score 65%) və gözlənmiş sistemlərdə (F-score 67%).', 'bs': 'Mi opisujemo podnošenje Univerziteta Maryland a na zadatak 10, podnošenje diskriminacijskih atributa: određene riječi trostruko (w1, w2, d), cilj je utvrditi je li d diskriminacijski atribut pripada w1, ali ne w2. Naša studija je cilj da utvrdi da li se uključivanje riječi može riješiti ovom izazovnom zadatku. Naša podnošljenja je taj problem kao nadzorna binarna klasifikacija koristeći jedine funkcije uključujuće riječi. Koristeći gausijski SVM model obučen samo na rezultatima podataka o validaciji u F-rezultatu od 60%. Također pokazujemo da su karakteristike sličnosti kosina učinkovitije, i u nepotrebnim sistemima (F-rezultat od 65%) i nadzornim sistemima (F-rezultat od 67%).', 'da': "Vi beskriver University of Marylands indlæg til SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes': givet ord tredobler (w1, w2, d), målet er at afgøre, om d er en diskriminerende attribut, der tilhører w1, men ikke w2. Vores undersøgelse sigter mod at afgøre, om ordindlejringer kan løse denne udfordrende opgave. Vores indsendelse kaster dette problem som overvåget binær klassificering ved hjælp af kun ord indlejring funktioner. Brug af en gaussisk SVM-model, der kun trænes på valideringsdata, resulterer i en F-score på 60%. Vi viser også, at cosinus lighedsegenskaber er mere effektive, både i ikke-overvågede systemer (F-score på 65%) og overvågede systemer (F-score på 67%).", 'cs': "Popisujeme podání univerzity Marylandu SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Zachycení diskriminačních atributů': při použití slova trojnásobně (w1, w2, d) je cílem určit, zda je d diskriminační atribut patřící do w1, ale ne do w2. Cílem naší studie je zjistit, zda slovní vložení může tento náročný úkol řešit. Náš příspěvek uvádí tento problém jako dohledovanou binární klasifikaci pomocí pouze funkcí vkládání slov. Použití gauského SVM modelu trénovaného pouze na validačních datech vede k F skóre 60%. Dále ukazujeme, že funkce podobnosti kosinusů jsou efektivnější jak u systémů bez dozoru (F-skóre 65%) tak u systémů s dozorem (F-skóre 67%).", 'bn': "আমরা মেরিল্যান্ড বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের সিমাইভাল-১০৮ টাস্ক ১০ 'বৈষম্য বৈষম্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীকে ক্যাপ্টারিং করা': প্রদান করা শব্দের ত্রিবিধ (উই১, উই২, ডি) এর লক্ষ্ আমাদের গবেষণার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে এই চ্যালেঞ্জের কাজের সাথে কথা বলা যায় কিনা। আমাদের আত্মসমর্পণ এই সমস্যাটি শুধুমাত্র শব্দ বিভিন্ন বিশেষভাবে পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হয়েছে। একটি গ্যাসিয়ান SVM মডেল ব্যবহার করে শুধুমাত্র বৈধ তথ্যের ফলে ৬০ শতাংশের একটি F-স্কোরের ফলে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে। আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে কোসিনের সমতুল্য বৈশিষ্ট্যের ব্যাপারে আরো কার্যকর, উভয়ই অরক্ষিত সিস্টেম (এফ স্কোর ৬৫%) এবং পর্যবেক্ষণ করা সিস্ট", 'ca': "Descrivem la subministració de la Universitat de Maryland a SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturint Discriminative Attributes': donant la paraula triples (w1, w2, d), l'objectiu és determinar si d és un atributdiscriminatori que pertany a w1 però no w2. El nostre estudi mira a determinar si l'integració de paraules pot abordar aquesta tasca desafiadora. La nostra presentació mostra aquest problema com a classificació binaria supervisada només fent servir les característiques d'incorporació de paraules. Utilitzant un model SVM gaussià entrenat només en dades de validació resulta en una puntuació F del 60%. També demostram que les característiques de similitud cosina són més efectives, tant en sistemes no supervisats (puntuació F del 65%) com en sistemes supervisats (puntuació F del 67%).", 'fi': "Kuvaamme Marylandin yliopiston submission to SemEval-018 Task 10, 'Capturing Discriminative Attributes': annettu sana kolminkertaistuu (w1, w2, d), tavoitteena on selvittää, onko d syrjivä attribuutti, joka kuuluu w1 mutta ei w2. Tutkimuksemme tavoitteena on selvittää, pystyvätkö sanaupotukset vastaamaan tähän haasteeseen. Lähetyksemme heittää tämän ongelman valvotuksi binaariluokitukseksi käyttäen vain sanan upotusominaisuuksia. Käyttämällä vain validointitietoihin koulutettua gaussilaista SVM-mallia F-pistemäärä on 60%. Osoitamme myös, että koosinuksen samankaltaisuusominaisuudet ovat tehokkaampia sekä valvomattomissa järjestelmissä (F-pistemäärä 65%) että valvotuissa järjestelmissä (F-pistemäärä 67%).", 'et': 'Kirjeldame Marylandi Ülikooli esitamist SemEval-018 ülesandele 10, "Diskrimineerivate atribuutide tabamine": antud sõna kolmekordselt (w1, w2, d), eesmärk on kindlaks teha, kas d on diskrimineeriv atribuut, mis kuulub w1, kuid mitte w2. Meie uuringu eesmärk on teha kindlaks, kas sõna manustamine suudab seda keerulist ülesannet lahendada. Meie esitamine loob selle probleemi järelevalvega binaarse klassifitseerimisena, kasutades ainult sõna manustamise funktsioone. Kasutades gaussi SVM mudelit, mis on koolitatud ainult valideerimisandmete põhjal, on F-skoor 60%. Samuti näitame, et koosinuse sarnasuse tunnused on efektiivsemad nii järelevalveta süsteemides (F-skoor 65%) kui ka järelevalvesüsteemides (F-skoor 67%).', 'hy': 'Մենք նկարագրում ենք Մարիլանդի համալսարանի ներկայացումը ՍեմԵվալ-01-ի 10-ի «Դիսկրմինատիվ առանձնահատկությունների բռնումը»: Տեղադրելով բառը երեք անգամ (w1, w2, d), նպատակը նպատակն է որոշել, արդյոք d-ը տարբերակող առանձնահատկություն է w1, բայց ոչ w2: Our study aims to determine whether word embeddings can address this challenging task.  Մեր ներկայացումը այս խնդիրը հանում է որպես վերահսկված երկու դասակարգման, օգտագործելով միայն բառերի ներգրավման հատկություններ: Using a gaussian SVM model trained only on validation data results in an F-score of 60%.  Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ տիեզերական նմանության առանձնահատկությունները ավելի արդյունավետ են, և ոչ վերահսկվող համակարգերում (F-գնահատականը 65 տոկոսից) և վերահսկվող համակարգերում (F-գնահատականը 67 տոկոսից):', 'ha': "Tuna bayyana al'amarin Universin Maryland d a aka gaskata zuwa SemEl-018 Taimar 10, 'Kake Taking DiscDiscernible Attitudes': da aka yi wa magana da takardar ta (w1, w2, d), goan na ƙayyade d ne wani sifar da za'a yi inganci wa w1 ne kuma ba w2 ba. Babu karatunmu na aimar ka ƙayyade maganar da za'a iya faɗi wannan aikin da ke kange. Our submission casts this problem as supervised binary classification using only word embedding features.  Yi amfani da wani misalin SvM na Gaussian an tsare shi kawai kan data masu inganci zasu ƙara wata F-score na 60%. Tuna nũna cewa kosin misalin su ne mafi masu amfani da, duk cikin tsari da ba'a tsare (F-score wa 65%) da kuma masu tsare system (F-score na 67%).", 'sk': 'Opisujemo predložitev Univerze v Marylandu SemEval-018 nalogi 10, "Zajemanje diskriminativnih atributov": podana beseda trojno (w1, w2, d), cilj je ugotoviti, ali je d diskriminacijski atribut, ki pripada w1, ne pa w2. Namen naše študije je ugotoviti, ali lahko vgradnja besed obravnava to zahtevno nalogo. Naša predložitev predstavlja ta problem kot nadzorovano binarno klasifikacijo z uporabo samo funkcij vgradnje besed. Z uporabo gaussijskega modela SVM, usposobljenega samo na podlagi validacijskih podatkov, je F-rezultat 60%. Pokazali smo tudi, da so značilnosti podobnosti kozinusa učinkovitejše, tako pri nenadzorovanih sistemih (F-rezultat 65%) kot pri nadzorovanih sistemih (F-rezultat 67%).', 'jv': "We describe the University of Maryeland's report to seminval-008 task 10, 'Capturan Diskiminate Attribute' (given word Triles (w1, w2, d), the goal is to define is a disc-imitating attribute of w1 and not w2. Isolat underline Where am I Guteran kelompok Awak dhéwé éntuk karo sistem sing perusahaan koisin sing luwih luwih apik, dadi iki dadi sak sistem sing gak nggawe (F-roti luwih cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-cara-car", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མེ་རིལ་ལེནཌིའི་ཆོག ང་ཚོའི་བརྩལ་ཞིག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་ལ་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གེ་ཁྱད་དུ་གཏོང་དགོས་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་དབང་ཆ་ལྟ་བུའི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་རྣམས་ལྟ་བུའི་གཉིས་པ་དབྱེ་རིགས gaussian SVM མ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ནི་ཕན་ཚེར་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྲངས་ཐོག་ལས་ཁོ་ན་60% ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་དེ་ལས་ལྡན་བྱེད་མི་འདུག', 'he': 'אנחנו מתארים את ההכנעה של אוניברסיטת מרילנד לסימוול-018 משימה 10, "תפיסת תוויות דיסקרמינציונטיות": בהתחשב במילה שלישית (w1, w2, d), המטרה היא לקבוע אם d הוא תווית דיסקרמינציונטית שייכת w1 אבל לא w2. המחקר שלנו מתכוון לקבוע אם תוספות מילים יכולות להתמודד עם המשימה המתגברת הזו. ההצגה שלנו נותנת את הבעיה הזאת ככיוון בינרי מפקח בשימוש רק תכונות הכניסה מילים. השימוש במודל SVM גאסי מאומן רק על נתוני אישור תוצאה בתוצאה F-נקודה של 60%. אנחנו גם מראים כי תכונות דומה קוסינית יותר יעילות, גם במערכות ללא השגחה (נקודת F של 65%) וגם במערכות שולטות (נקודת F של 67%).'}
{'en': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10 : Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge', 'es': 'Tarea 10 del Sistema de Laboratorio de PNL de NTU en SemEval-2018: Verificación de las diferencias semánticas mediante la integración de la información distribucional y el conocimiento experto', 'ar': 'نظام مختبر NTU NLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 10: التحقق من الاختلافات الدلالية من خلال دمج معلومات التوزيع ومعرفة الخبراء', 'pt': 'NTU NLP Lab System na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 10: Verificando diferenças semânticas integrando informações distributivas e conhecimento especializado', 'fr': "NTU NLP Lab System au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 10\xa0: Vérifier les différences sémantiques en intégrant les informations distributionnelles et les connaissances d'experts", 'ja': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval -2018 Task 10: Distributional Information and Expert Knowledgeの統合による意味的な違いの検証', 'zh': 'NTU NLP实验室系SemEval-2018务10:整合布信专业知识以验语义异', 'ru': 'Лабораторная система NTU NLP на SemEval-2018 Задача 10: Проверка семантических различий путем интеграции распределительной информации и экспертных знаний', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 10 पर NTU NLP लैब सिस्टम: वितरण संबंधी जानकारी और विशेषज्ञ ज्ञान को एकीकृत करके शब्दार्थ मतभेदों को सत्यापित करना', 'ga': 'Córas Saotharlainne NTU NLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 10: Difríochtaí Séimeantacha a Fhíorú trí Fhaisnéis Dáileacháin agus Saineolas a Chomhtháthú', 'hu': 'NTU NLP Laboratóriumi Rendszer a SemEval-2018 10. feladat: A szemantikus különbségek ellenőrzése elosztási információk és szakértői ismeretek integrálásával', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Εργαστηριακό Σύστημα της NTU στο έργο 10: Επαλήθευση Σημαντικών Διαφορών με την ενσωμάτωση Διανεμητικών Πληροφοριών και Εμπειρογνωμόνων Γνώσεων', 'it': 'NTU NLP Lab System a SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verificare le differenze semantiche integrando le informazioni distributive e le conoscenze degli esperti', 'mk': 'NTU NLP лабораториски систем на SemEval-2018 задача 10: Верификување на семантичките разлики со интеграција на дистрибуционалните информации и експертски знаења', 'ms': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verify Semantic Differences by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge', 'mt': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verification Semantic Differences by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge', 'kk': 'NTU NLP лаборатория жүйесі жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында 10: Үлестірілген мәліметті және эксперттің білімін біріктіру арқылы біріктіру үшін біріктірілген бөлшектерді тексеру', 'lt': 'NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1 NT1', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 10: വിതരണ വിവരങ്ങളും വിവരങ്ങളും അറിവും കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന', 'mn': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Distribution Information and Expert Knowledge', 'no': 'NTU NLP Lab System på semiEval-2018 Oppgåve 10: Kontroller semiantiske forskjeller ved å integrera distribusjonsinformasjon og ekspertkjenning', 'pl': 'NTU NLP Lab System w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 10: Weryfikacja różnic semantycznych poprzez integrację informacji dystrybucyjnych i wiedzy eksperckiej', 'ro': 'Sistemul de laborator NTU NLP la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 10: Verificarea diferențelor semantice prin integrarea informațiilor distribuționale și a cunoștințelor experților', 'sv': 'NTU NLP Lab System på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 10: Verifiera semantiska skillnader genom att integrera distributionsinformation och expertkunskap', 'sr': 'NTU NLP laboratorijski sistem na zadatku 10. polevala-2018: proveravanje semantičkih razlika integracijom distribucijske informacije i znanja eksperta', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Information and Expert Knowledge', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval- 2018: Semantic Differences by combining distribution information and Expert Knowledge', 'ur': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Semantic Differences verifying by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEvl-208 Task 10: kiểm soát Semantic differences by Integrating phân chia thông tin và kiến thức chuyên môn', 'bg': 'Лабораторна система на НТУ в Задача 10: Проверка на семантичните различия чрез интегриране на дистрибуционната информация и експертното знание', 'da': 'NTU NLP Lab System på SemEval-2018 Opgave 10: Bekræftelse af semantiske forskelle ved at integrere distributionsinformation og ekspertviden', 'nl': 'NTU NLP Lab Systeem bij SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Semantische Verschillen verifiëren door Distributionele Informatie en Deskundige Kennis te integreren', 'hr': 'NTU NLP laboratorijski sustav na zadatku 10. polovječna ispitivanja-2018: proveravanje semantičkih razlika integracijom distribucijske informacije i znanja stručnjaka', 'ko': 'NTU NLP 실험실 시스템SemEval-18 임무10: 분포 정보 통합과 전문가 지식 검증을 통해 의미 차이', 'de': 'NTU NLP Lab System bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 10: Semantische Unterschiede durch Integration von Distributionsinformationen und Expertenwissen überprüfen', 'fa': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Distribution Information and Expert Knowledge', 'id': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verify Semantic Differences by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge', 'tr': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge', 'sq': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge', 'sw': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge', 'af': 'NTU NLP Lab Stelsel by SemEval-2018 Taak 10: Verifiseer Semantiese Verskil deur integreer Verspreidingsinformasie en Eksperte kennis', 'hy': 'ԴՆԹ Լաբորատորիայի համակարգը, 2018 թվականի «Սեմենտիկ տարբերությունների ստուգելը՝ բաշխման տեղեկությունների և մասնագետների ինտեգրելով»', 'am': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Distribution Information and Expert Knowledge', 'az': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Distribution Information and Expert Knowledge Integration', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজের ১০-এ NTU NLP ল্যাব সিস্টেম: বিতরণ ও বিশেষজ্ঞ তথ্য যুক্ত করে সেম্যান্টিক পার্থক্য নিশ্চিত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'NTU NLP Laboratorijski sistem na zadatku 10. poluvjeta 2018. godine: proveravanje semantičkih razlika integracijom distribucijskih informacija i znanja stručnjaka', 'cs': 'NTU NLP Laboratorní systém na SemEval-2018 Úkol 10: Ověřování sémantických rozdílů integrací distribučních informací a odborných znalostí', 'ca': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge', 'et': 'NTU NLP laborisüsteem SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 10: Semantiliste erinevuste kontrollimine jaotusinfo ja ekspertteadmiste integreerimise kaudu', 'fi': 'NTU NLP Lab System SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 10: Semanttisten erojen todentaminen integroimalla jakelutieto ja asiantuntijatieto', 'jv': 'USEalah', 'sk': 'Laboratorijski sistem NTU NLP na SemEval-2018 Naloga 10: Preverjanje semantičnih razlik z integracijo distribucijskih informacij in strokovnega znanja', 'he': 'NTU מערכת מעבדה NLP ב SemEval-2018 משימה 10: לבדוק ההבדלים סמנטיים באמצעות השתלב מידע פיתוח ומיודע מומחה', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'NTU NLP Lab System at SemEval-2018 Task 10: Verifying Semantic Differences by Integrating Distributional Information and Expert Knowledge'}
{'en': 'This paper presents the NTU NLP Lab system for the SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes task. Word embeddings, pointwise mutual information (PMI), ConceptNet edges and shortest path lengths are utilized as input features to build binary classifiers to tell whether an attribute is discriminative for a pair of concepts. Our neural network model reaches about 73 % F1 score on the test set and ranks the 3rd in the task. Though the attributes to deal with in this task are all visual, our models are not provided with any image data. The results indicate that visual information can be derived from textual data.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نظام NTU NLP Lab لمهمة SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes. يتم استخدام تضمين Word ، والمعلومات المتبادلة النقطية (PMI) ، وحواف ConceptNet وأقصر أطوال المسارات كميزات إدخال لبناء مصنفات ثنائية لمعرفة ما إذا كانت السمة تمييزية لزوج من المفاهيم. يصل نموذج الشبكة العصبية الخاص بنا إلى حوالي 73٪ من درجة F1 في مجموعة الاختبار ويحتل المرتبة الثالثة في المهمة. على الرغم من أن السمات التي يجب التعامل معها في هذه المهمة كلها مرئية ، إلا أن نماذجنا لا يتم تزويدها بأي بيانات صور. تشير النتائج إلى أنه يمكن اشتقاق المعلومات المرئية من البيانات النصية.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta o sistema NTU NLP Lab para a tarefa de Captura de Atributos Discriminativos do SemEval-2018. Embeddings de palavras, informações mútuas pontuais (PMI), arestas do ConceptNet e comprimentos de caminho mais curtos são utilizados como recursos de entrada para construir classificadores binários para dizer se um atributo é discriminativo para um par de conceitos. Nosso modelo de rede neural atinge cerca de 73% da pontuação F1 no conjunto de teste e ocupa o 3º lugar na tarefa. Embora os atributos a serem tratados nesta tarefa sejam todos visuais, nossos modelos não são fornecidos com nenhum dado de imagem. Os resultados indicam que a informação visual pode ser derivada de dados textuais.', 'fr': "Cet article présente le système NTU NLP Lab pour la tâche SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes. Les intégrations de mots, les informations mutuelles ponctuelles (PMI), les arêtes ConceptNet et les longueurs de chemin les plus courtes sont utilisées comme entités d'entrée pour créer des classificateurs binaires afin de déterminer si un attribut est discriminant pour une paire de concepts. Notre modèle de réseau neuronal atteint un score F1 d'environ 73\xa0% sur l'ensemble de tests et se classe au 3e rang de la tâche. Bien que les attributs à traiter dans cette tâche soient tous visuels, nos modèles ne sont fournis avec aucune donnée d'image. Les résultats indiquent que des informations visuelles peuvent être dérivées de données textuelles.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta el sistema NTU NLP Lab para la tarea SemEval-2018 Capturando atributos discriminativos. Las incrustaciones de palabras, la información mutua puntual (PMI), los bordes de ConceptNet y las longitudes de ruta más cortas se utilizan como entidades de entrada para crear clasificadores binarios para determinar si un atributo es discriminatorio para un par de conceptos. Nuestro modelo de red neuronal alcanza alrededor del 73% de la puntuación F1 en el conjunto de pruebas y ocupa el tercer lugar en la tarea. Aunque los atributos a tratar en esta tarea son todos visuales, nuestros modelos no cuentan con ningún dato de imagen. Los resultados indican que la información visual puede derivarse de datos textuales.', 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval -2018 Capturing Discriminative AttributesタスクのためのNTU NLP Labシステムを紹介する。単語埋め込み、ポイントワイズ相互情報（ PMI ）、ConceptNetエッジ、および最短パス長は、属性が一対の概念に対して識別可能かどうかを判断するためのバイナリ分類子を構築するための入力機能として利用されます。当社のニューラルネットワークモデルは、テストセットで約73 ％のF 1スコアに達し、タスクの3番目にランク付けされます。このタスクで扱う属性はすべて視覚的ですが、当社のモデルには画像データは提供されていません。結果は、視覚情報がテキストデータから導出され得ることを示す。', 'zh': '本文言SemEval-2018获判NTU NLP实验室系统。 词嵌、逐点互信息 (PMI)、ConceptNet 边、最短路径,以立二进制分器,以决属性之判别。 吾神经网络式于试集上至于 73% F1 之数,而排名第 3 位于事。 虽然此理皆可视,吾法无所供。 结果表明,视息从文本数中得之。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 कैप्चरिंग भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताएँ कार्य के लिए NTU NLP लैब सिस्टम प्रस्तुत करता है। शब्द एम्बेडिंग, पॉइंटवाइज आपसी जानकारी (पीएमआई), कॉन्सेप्टनेट किनारों और सबसे छोटी पथ लंबाई का उपयोग बाइनरी क्लासिफायर बनाने के लिए इनपुट सुविधाओं के रूप में किया जाता है ताकि यह बताया जा सके कि क्या कोई विशेषता अवधारणाओं की एक जोड़ी के लिए भेदभावपूर्ण है। हमारा तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल परीक्षण सेट पर लगभग 73% एफ 1 स्कोर तक पहुंचता है और कार्य में तीसरे स्थान पर है। हालांकि इस कार्य में निपटने के लिए विशेषताएं सभी दृश्य हैं, हमारे मॉडल किसी भी छवि डेटा के साथ प्रदान नहीं किए जाते हैं। परिणाम इंगित करते हैं कि दृश्य जानकारी को पाठ्य डेटा से प्राप्त किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'В данной статье представлена система NTU NLP Lab для задачи SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes. Вложения слов, точечная взаимная информация (PMI), ребра ConceptNet и кратчайшие длины пути используются в качестве входных признаков для построения двоичных классификаторов, чтобы определить, является ли атрибут дискриминационным для пары понятий. Наша модель нейронной сети достигает 73% F1 на тестовом наборе и занимает 3-е место в задаче. Хотя все атрибуты, с которыми приходится иметь дело в этой задаче, визуальны, наши модели не обеспечены никакими данными изображения. Результаты показывают, что визуальная информация может быть получена из текстовых данных.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair córas NTU NLP Lab don tasc SemEval-2018 Gabháil Tréithe Idirdhealaitheacha. Úsáidtear leabaithe focal, faisnéis fhrithpháirteach pointwise (PMI), imill ConceptNet agus an fad cosáin is giorra mar ghnéithe ionchuir chun aicmitheoirí dénártha a thógáil chun a rá an bhfuil tréith idirdhealaitheach do phéire coincheapa. Sroicheann ár múnla líonra néarúil thart ar 73% scór F1 ar an tacar tástála agus tá sé sa 3ú háit sa tasc. Cé gur tréithe amhairc iad go léir le déileáil leo sa tasc seo, ní chuirtear aon sonraí íomhá ar fáil dár múnlaí. Léiríonn na torthaí gur féidir faisnéis amhairc a dhíorthú ó shonraí téacsúla.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja az NTU NLP Lab rendszerét a SemEval-2018 megkülönböztető attribútumok rögzítéséhez. A szóbeágyazások, a pontos kölcsönös információk (PMI), a ConceptNet élek és a legrövidebb útvonalhosszúságok bemeneti funkcióként használhatók bináris osztályozók létrehozására, hogy megállapítsák, hogy egy attribútum diszkriminatív-e egy fogalmpár esetében. Neurális hálózati modellünk körülbelül 73%-os F1 pontszámot ér el a tesztkészleten, és a harmadik helyen áll a feladatban. Bár az ebben a feladatban kezelendő attribútumok mind vizuálisak, modelleink nem rendelkeznek képadatokkal. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a vizuális információ szöveges adatokból származhat.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει το σύστημα εργαστηρίων της NTU για την εργασία καταγραφής διακριτικών χαρακτηριστικών. Οι ενσωματωμένες λέξεις, οι σημειακές αμοιβαίες πληροφορίες (οι άκρες και τα συντομότερα μήκη διαδρομής χρησιμοποιούνται ως χαρακτηριστικά εισαγωγής για την κατασκευή δυαδικών ταξινομητών για να διαπιστώσετε εάν ένα χαρακτηριστικό είναι διακριτικό για ένα ζευγάρι εννοιών. Το μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου μας φτάνει περίπου 73% βαθμολογία στο σετ δοκιμών και κατατάσσεται στην τρίτη θέση στην εργασία. Αν και τα χαρακτηριστικά που πρέπει να αντιμετωπίσουμε σε αυτό το έργο είναι όλα οπτικά, τα μοντέλα μας δεν παρέχονται με δεδομένα εικόνας. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι οι οπτικές πληροφορίες μπορούν να αντληθούν από δεδομένα κειμένου.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი გააჩვენებს NTU NLP ლაბ სისტემის SemEval-2018 დასაწყება დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტების დავალებისთვის. სიტყვების შეყვარება, საშუალოდ საერთო ინფორმაცია (PMI), ConceptNet ბრძანები და ნაკლები სიგრძანები გამოყენება, როგორც ბიინერი კლასიფიკაციების შექმნავის მონაცემული ფუნქციები გამოყენება, რომ ატრიბ ჩვენი ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელი 73% F1 წერტილი ტესტის ნაწილში და მესამე წერტილის ნაწილში მოთავსდება. მაგრამ ამ დავალებში ატრიბუტები ყველაფერი ვიზუალურია, ჩვენი მოდელები არ იყოს ყველაფერი გამოსახულების მონაცემებით. წარმოდგენები მინდა, რომ ვიზუალური ინფორმაცია ტექსტულური მონაცემებისგან შეიძლება იყოს.', 'it': 'Questo articolo presenta il sistema NTU NLP Lab per il compito SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes. Embedding di parole, pointwise mutual information (PMI), bordi ConceptNet e lunghezze di percorso più brevi sono utilizzati come caratteristiche di input per costruire classificatori binari per dire se un attributo è discriminatorio per una coppia di concetti. Il nostro modello di rete neurale raggiunge circa il 73% di punteggio F1 sul set di test e si classifica al terzo posto nel compito. Anche se gli attributi da affrontare in questo compito sono tutti visivi, i nostri modelli non sono forniti con alcun dato di immagine. I risultati indicano che le informazioni visive possono essere derivate da dati testuali.', 'lt': 'This paper presents the NTU NLP Lab system for the SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes task.  žodžių įterpimai, tikslinė abipusė informacija (PMI), ConceptNet kraštai ir trumpiausi kelio ilgiai naudojami kaip įėjimo savybės dviejų klasifikatorių kūrimui siekiant nustatyti, ar požymis yra diskriminacinis kelioms sąvokoms. Mūsų nervų tinklo modelis pasiekia apie 73% F1 tašką bandymų rinkinyje ir rankuoja trečią užduotį. Nors atributai, kuriuos reikia spręsti šioje užduotyje, yra visi vizuali, mūsų modeliams nėra jokių vaizdo duomenų. Rezultatai rodo, kad vizualiąją informaciją galima gauti iš tekstinių duomenų.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го претставува системот на NTU NLP лабораторија за задачата SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes. Вклучувањата на зборови, поентични взаемни информации (PMI), работите на ConceptNet и најкратките должини на патеката се користат како влезни карактеристики за изградба на бинарни класификатори за да се каже дали атрибутот е дискриминативен за неколку концепти. Our neural network model reaches about 73% F1 score on the test set and ranks the 3rd in the task.  Иако атрибутите кои треба да се справат со оваа задача се сите визуелни, нашите модели не се обезбедени со никакви податоци на слика. Резултатите покажуваат дека визуелните информации можат да се извлечат од текстуални податоци.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз NTU NLP лабораториялық жүйесін 2018 жылы бөлімінің дискриминациялық аттрибуттар тапсырмасын түсіру жүйесін көрсетеді. Сөздерді ендіру, қашықтағы мәлімет (PMI), ConceptNet шектері және ең қысқа жолдың ұзындығы екі концепция үшін атрибутты дискриминациялық екенін анықтау үшін бинарлық классификаторларды құру үшін ендіру мүмкінді Неврал желіміздің үлгісіміз тексеру бағдарламасында 73% F1 деңгейіне жеткізеді және тапсырманың 3- ші деңгейіне жеткізеді. Бұл тапсырманың атрибуттары барлық көрінетін, біздің үлгілеріміз кескін деректеріне келтірілмейді. Нәтижелер көрініс мәліметі мәтіндік деректерден шығарылады деп белгілейді.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ക്യാപ്റ്റിമിനിറ്റീവ് കുറ്റപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള NTU NLP ലാബ് സിസ്റ്റം കാണിക വാക്കുകളുടെ ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റ്നെറ്റിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റ് നെറ്റിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളും കുറഞ്ഞ പാത്തിന്റെ നീളങ്ങളും ഇന്\u200dപുട നമ്മുടെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡല്\u200d 73% എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d പരീക്ഷണസെറ്റില്\u200d എത്തുകയും, ജോലിയില്\u200d മൂന് ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാനുള്ള ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d എല്ലാം കാണുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കിലും, നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ചിത്ര ഡേറ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan sistem makmal NTU NLP untuk tugas SemEval-2018 Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif. Penampilan perkataan, maklumat saling bertujuan (PMI), pinggir ConceptNet dan panjang laluan paling pendek digunakan sebagai ciri input untuk membina pengklasifikasi binari untuk memberitahu sama ada atribut adalah diskriminatif bagi sepasang konsep. Model rangkaian saraf kita mencapai sekitar 73% skor F1 pada set ujian dan peringkat ke-3 dalam tugas. Though the attributes to deal with in this task are all visual, our models are not provided with any image data.  Keputusan menunjukkan bahawa maklumat visual boleh dihimpunkan dari data teks.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta s-sistema tal-NTU NLP Lab għall-kompitu SemEval-2018 li jinkiseb Attributi Diskriminattivi. L-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem, l-informazzjoni reċiproka lejn il-punt (PMI), it-truf tal-ConceptNet u t-tul l-iqsar tal-mogħdija huma użati bħala karatteristiċi ta’ input biex jinbnew klassifikaturi binarji biex jgħidu jekk attribut huwiex diskriminatorju għal par ta’ kunċetti. Il-mudell tan-netwerk newrali tagħna jilħaq madwar 73% tal-punteġġ F1 fis-sett tat-test u jikklassifika t-tielet fil-kompitu. Għalkemm l-attributi li għandhom jiġu ttrattati f’dan il-kompitu huma kollha viżivi, il-mudelli tagħna mhumiex ipprovduti bl-ebda dejta tal-immaġni. Ir-riżultati jindikaw li l-informazzjoni viżwali tista’ tiġi dderivata minn dejta testwali.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser NTU NLP Lab-systemet for semiEval-2018 og hentar diskriminate attributt-oppgåve. Ordinnbyggingar, påpeisk mellomtenane informasjon (PMI), ConceptNet-kantar og kortste banengde vert bruka som inndata-funksjonar for å bygge binærklassifikatorar for å fortelle om ein attributt er diskriminativ for ein par konseptar. Nøyralnettverksmodellen vår når omtrent 73% F1- poeng på testsettet og reknar den tredje i oppgåva. Selv om attributtane som skal handsama i denne oppgåva er alle synlege, er modelane våre ikkje tilgjengelege med nokon biletdata. Resultatet viser at visualinformasjon kan deriverast frå tekstdata.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono system NTU NLP Lab dla zadania SemEval-2018 Przechwytywanie atrybutów dyskryminacyjnych. Osadzania słów, punktowe wzajemne informacje (PMI), krawędzie ConceptNet i najkrótsze długości ścieżek są wykorzystywane jako funkcje wejściowe do budowy klasyfikatorów binarnych, aby określić, czy atrybut jest dyskryminacyjny dla pary koncepcji. Nasz model sieci neuronowej osiąga około 73% F1 punktu na zestawie testowym i zajmuje trzecie miejsce w zadaniu. Chociaż atrybuty, którymi należy się poradzić w tym zadaniu są wszystkie wizualne, nasze modele nie są dostarczane żadnymi danymi obrazowymi. Wyniki wskazują, że informacje wizualne można uzyskać z danych tekstowych.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас NTU NLP лабораторийн системийг SemEval-2018 оны хувьд дискриминацийн атрибутын ажил барьж байна. Хоёр ойлголтын хувьд харилцааны харилцааны мэдээлэл (PMI), ConceptNet хэсэг болон хамгийн богино замын урт нь хоёр ойлголтын хувьд харилцааны харилцааны шинж чанарыг бий болгох боломжтой болгож хэрэглэгддэг. Бидний мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар шалгалт дээр 73% F1 оноо хүртдэг ба ажлын 3 дахь оноо хүртдэг. Энэ ажлын тухай зохицох шинж чанар бүгд харагдаж байгаа ч, бидний загварууд ямар ч зураг өгөгдлийг өгдөггүй. Үүний үр дүнд харааны мэдээлэл textual data-аас гаргаж болно гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă sistemul NTU NLP Lab pentru sarcina SemEval-2018 Capturarea atributelor discriminatorii. Încorporările de cuvinte, informațiile reciproce punctuale (PMI), marginile ConceptNet și cele mai scurte lungimi de cale sunt utilizate ca caracteristici de intrare pentru a construi clasificatori binari pentru a spune dacă un atribut este discriminatoriu pentru o pereche de concepte. Modelul nostru de rețea neurală atinge aproximativ 73% punctaj F1 pe setul de teste și ocupă locul 3 în sarcină. Deși atributele cu care trebuie să se ocupe în această sarcină sunt toate vizuale, modelele noastre nu sunt furnizate cu date de imagine. Rezultatele indică faptul că informațiile vizuale pot fi derivate din date textuale.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sistem NLP laboratorija NTU za zadatak polovine-2018, koji prihvaća diskriminativne atribute. Uključenje reči, usmjereno zajedničke informacije (PMI), ivice koncepcioneta i najkraće dužine puteva koriste se kao ulazne funkcije za izgradnju binarnih klasifikatora kako bi rekli da li je atribut diskriminiran za par koncepta. Naš neuralni mrežan model dostiže oko 73% F1 rezultata na testu i reduje 3. u zadatku. Iako su atributi za rješavanje ovog zadatka svi vizualni, naši modeli nisu pruženi podacima o slikama. Rezultati ukazuju na to da vizualne informacije mogu biti izvedene iz tekstualnih podataka.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar NTU NLP Lab-systemet för SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes uppgiften. Ordinbäddningar, punktvis ömsesidig information (PMI), ConceptNet kanter och kortaste banlängder används som inmatningsfunktioner för att bygga binära klassificerare för att avgöra om ett attribut är diskriminerande för ett par begrepp. Vår neurala nätverksmodell når cirka 73% F1 poäng på testset och rankas trea i uppgiften. Även om attributen att hantera i denna uppgift är alla visuella, är våra modeller inte försedda med någon bilddata. Resultaten indikerar att visuell information kan härledas från textdata.', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddan wuxuu soo saaraa nidaamka labka ee SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes. Word embeddings, pointwise mutual information (PMI), ConceptNet edges and shortest path lengths are utilized as input features to build binary classifiers to tell whether an attribute is discriminative for a pair of concepts.  Tusaalka shabakadda neurada ah wuxuu gaadhaa qiyaastii 73% F1 score oo ku qoran saxda imtixaanka, wuxuuna heeraa saxda saddexaad ee shaqada. In kastoo ay takhasuska arimahan lagu sameeyo ay wada yihiin wax arag leh, modelalkayaga lagama siiyo macluumaad sawir ah. Abaalku waxay ka muuqataa in macluumaadka aragtida laga heli karo macluumaadka qoraalka.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval- 2018 குணங்களை பிடிக்கும் செயலின் NTU NLP லாப் அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. Name எங்கள் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரி சோதனை அமைப்பில் 73% F1 புள்ளியை அடைக்கும் மற்றும் பணியில் மூன்றாவது நிலை இந்த பணியில் செயல்படுத்த வேண்டிய குணங்கள் அனைத்தும் பார்வையாக இருந்தாலும், எங்கள் மாதிரிகள் எந்த பிம்பத் முடிவுகள் உரை தரவிலிருந்து பார்வையான தகவல் காட்டும் என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ NTU NLP ලැබ් පද්ධතිය සම්වේල-2018 විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වැඩක් අල්ලගන්න. WordEmbdings, Pointwise intermedial info (PMI), ConsNet Edges and Shortest path length are Used as input Featuries to building Binary classifiers to say if an Attribe is discrimitive for a Pair of Considers. අපේ න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය මොඩල් 73% F1 ස්කෝර් එකට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා වැඩේ තුන්වෙනි ස්කෝර් එකට ලැබෙනවා. හැබැයි මේ වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න හැම විශේෂයක්ම සේරම දර්ශනයි, අපේ මොඩේල් පින්තූර දත්ත තියෙන්නේ නෑ. ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'ur': 'This paper presents the NTU NLP Lab system for the SemEval-2018 Discriminated Attributes task. Word embedding, pointwise mutual information (PMI), ConceptNet edges and shortest path length are used as input features to build binary classifiers to tell whether an attribute is discriminative for a pair of concepts. ہمارے نیورال نیٹ ورک موڈل ٹیسٹ پر 73% فی 1 سکوٹ پہنچ رہا ہے اور کام میں تیسرا رقم کرتا ہے۔ Though the attributes to deal with this task are all visual, our models are not provided with any image data. نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ visual information can be derived from textual data.', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval- 2018 SemEval- 2018 SemEval- 2018 hisobotini qabul qilish uchun NTU NLP Lab tizimini koʻrsatiladi. Name Name Agar bu vazifa bilan boshqarish xossalari hamma narsa ko'rinishi mumkin, bizning modellarimiz hech qanday rasm maʼlumot yoʻq. @ info", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu hệ thống NTU NLP Lab, for the SemEvol-208 Bắt giữ công việc này. Từ nhúng vào, thông tin cấu hình lẫn nhau (PMI), ConcPTNet edges và the smallest path longer are used as tính năng nhập to built binary classificars to tell if a controlling for a pair of ti. Mô hình mạng thần kinh của chúng ta đạt tới khoảng 73=. F1 ghi điểm trên nhóm thử nghiệm và xếp hạng thứ ba trong nhiệm vụ. Mặc dù các thuộc tính cần đối phó trong nhiệm vụ này đều là hiển thị, nhưng mẫu của chúng tôi không có bất kỳ dữ liệu ảnh nào. Kết quả cho thấy thông tin thị giác có thể bắt nguồn từ dữ liệu kết cấu.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя системата на НЛП Лабораторията на НТУ за задачата Заснемане на дискриминационни атрибути. Вградените думи, точковата взаимна информация (ПМИ), ръбовете и най-късите дължини на пътя се използват като входни функции за изграждане на двоични класификатори, за да се каже дали даден атрибут е дискриминиращ за двойка концепции. Нашият модел на невронна мрежа достига около 73% резултат на теста и се нарежда на 3-то място в задачата. Въпреки че атрибутите, с които трябва да се справим в тази задача, са визуални, нашите модели не разполагат с никакви данни за изображения. Резултатите показват, че визуалната информация може да се извлече от текстови данни.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer NTU NLP Lab-systemet til SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes opgaven. Ordindlejringer, punktvis gensidig information (PMI), ConceptNet kanter og korteste sti længder anvendes som input funktioner til at bygge binære klassifikationer til at fortælle, om en attribut er diskriminerende for et par begreber. Vores neurale netværksmodel når omkring 73% F1 score på testsættet og rangerer den 3. i opgaven. Selvom attributterne til at beskæftige sig med i denne opgave er alle visuelle, er vores modeller ikke forsynet med nogen billeddata. Resultaterne indikerer, at visuelle oplysninger kan udledes af tekstdata.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja NTU NLP laboratorijski sustav za zadatak polovičnog razdoblja 2018. Uključenje riječi, usmjereno zajedničke informacije (PMI), ivice koncepcioneta i najkraće dužine puta koriste se kao ulazne karakteristike za izgradnju binarnih klasifikatora kako bi rekli da li je atribut diskriminiran za par koncepta. Naš model neuralne mreže dostiže oko 73% F1 rezultata na testu i reduje 3. u zadatku. Iako su atributi za rješavanje ovog zadatka svi vizualni, naši modeli nisu pruženi podacima o slikama. Rezultati pokazuju da vizualne informacije mogu dobiti iz tekstualnih podataka.', 'nl': 'Dit document presenteert het NTU NLP Lab systeem voor de SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminatieve Attributes taak. Woordinsluitingen, puntwise onderlinge informatie (PMI), ConceptNet-randen en kortste padlengtes worden gebruikt als invoerfuncties om binaire classificatoren te bouwen om te bepalen of een attribuut onderscheidend is voor een paar concepten. Ons neurale netwerkmodel bereikt ongeveer 73% F1 score op de testset en rangschikt de 3e in de taak. Hoewel de attributen om mee te werken in deze taak allemaal visueel zijn, zijn onze modellen niet voorzien van beeldgegevens. De resultaten geven aan dat visuele informatie kan worden afgeleid van tekstuele gegevens.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan sistem NTU NLP Lab untuk tugas SemEval-2018 Menangkap Atribut Diskriminatif. Penampilan kata, informasi saling bertujuan (PMI), pinggir ConceptNet dan panjang jalur yang paling pendek digunakan sebagai fitur input untuk membangun klasifikasi binari untuk memberitahu apakah atribut diskriminatif untuk sepasang konsep. Model jaringan saraf kita mencapai sekitar 73% skor F1 pada set tes dan ranking ketiga dalam tugas. Meskipun atribut yang harus diselesaikan dalam tugas ini semua visual, model kita tidak disediakan dengan data gambar apapun. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa informasi visual dapat dipakai dari data teks.', 'ko': '본고는 NTU NLP 실험실 시스템을 소개하여SemEval-18 포획 감별 속성 임무에 사용한다.단어 삽입, 점별 상호 정보(PMI), 개념망 가장자리와 최단 경로 길이를 입력 특징으로 삼아 이원 분류기를 구축하여 속성이 한 쌍의 개념에 대해 구분성이 있는지 판단한다.우리의 신경 네트워크 모델은 테스트 집합에서 73%의 F1 점수를 얻어 임무 중 3위에 올랐다.이 작업에서 처리할 속성은 모두 가시적이지만, 저희 모델은 이미지 데이터를 제공하지 않습니다.그 결과 시각적 정보는 텍스트 데이터에서 얻을 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha mfumo wa Makao ya NTU NLP kwa ajili ya SemEval-2018 Kukamata jukumu la Wahalaliki wa Ubaguzi. Mpango wa maneno, yenye uelewa wa taarifa tofauti (PMI), upande wa Mtandao wa ConceptNet na lengo la barabara ndogo hutumiwa kama vipengenezo vya input ili kuwajenga wataalamu wa binafsi ili kueleza kama kifaa kina ubaguzi kwa mawazo mawili. Mradi wetu wa mtandao wa neura unafikia takribani asilimia 73 ya F1 kwenye seti ya jaribio na kuingia nafasi ya tatu katika kazi. Japokuwa vifaa vya kukabiliana na kazi hii vyote vinaonekana, mifano yetu haipatikani taarifa yoyote ya picha. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa taarifa za kuona zinaweza kupatikana na taarifa za msingi.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt das NTU NLP Lab System für die SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes Aufgabe vor. Worteinbettungen, punktweise gegenseitige Informationen (PMI), ConceptNet-Kanten und kürzeste Pfadlängen werden als Eingabefunktionen verwendet, um binäre Klassifikatoren zu erstellen, um festzustellen, ob ein Attribut für ein Paar von Konzepten diskriminierend ist. Unser neuronales Netzwerk-Modell erreicht etwa 73% F1-Punktzahl auf dem Testset und belegt den dritten Platz in der Aufgabe. Obwohl die Attribute, mit denen wir uns in dieser Aufgabe befassen müssen, alle visuell sind, sind unsere Modelle nicht mit Bilddaten versehen. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass visuelle Informationen aus Textdaten abgeleitet werden können.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم آزمایشگاه NLP NTU را برای نیمه سال ۲۰۱۸ نشان می\u200cدهد که در حال حاضر کارهای مختلف ویژه\u200cهای مختلف است. جمع کردن کلمات، اطلاعات متفاوتی (PMI) به سمت نقطه\u200cای، لبه\u200cهای ConceptNet و طول\u200cهای کوتاه\u200cترین مسیر به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای ورودی برای ساختن گروه\u200cهای دویینی استفاده می\u200cشوند تا بگویند آیا یک ویژه برای یک جفت نظریه جدایی است. مدل شبکه عصبی ما حدود 73 درصد امتیاز F1 را در مجموعه آزمایش می رساند و درجات سوم در کار می رسد. اگرچه ویژگی\u200cهایی که باید در این کار برخورد کنیم، همه\u200cی مدل\u200cهای ما با هیچ داده\u200cای از تصویر داده نمی\u200cشوند. نتایج نشان می\u200cدهند که اطلاعات دیده\u200cای از داده\u200cهای متن\u200cآوری می\u200cشود.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel die NTU NLP Lab stelsel voor die semiEval-2018 om diskriminatiewe eienskappe te vang. Woord inbettings, puntjies gemeenskaplike inligting (PMI), ConceptNet kante en kortste pad lengte word gebruik as invoer funksies om binêre klassifiseerders te bou om te vertel of 'n atribut diskrimineer is vir' n paar van konsepte. Ons neuralnetwerk model bereik omtrent 73% F1 telling op die toets stel en rank die derde in die taak. Alhoewel die eienskappe om in hierdie taak te behandel is alle visuele, ons modelle word nie verskaf met enige beelddata nie. Die resultate wys dat visuale inligting van tekstuele data afgelei kan word.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet sistemin NTU NLP Lab për detyrën SemEval-2018 duke kapur atributet diskriminuese. Përmbajtja e fjalëve, informacioni me qëllim të ndërsjelltë (PMI), krahët e ConceptNet dhe gjatësitë më të shkurtra të rrugës përdoren si elemente të hyrjes për të ndërtuar klasifikuesit binarë për të treguar nëse një attribut është diskriminues për një çift konceptesh. Modeli ynë i rrjetit nervor arrin rreth 73% rezultat F1 në grupin e testit dhe renditet i treti në detyrë. Megjithëse atributet që duhet të trajtohen në këtë detyrë janë të gjitha vizuale, modelet tona nuk janë furnizuar me asnjë të dhënë imazhi. Rezultatet tregojnë se informacioni vizual mund të nxirret nga të dhënat tekstuale.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz NTU NLP Lab sistemini SemEval-2018 diskriminaty atributlar täblisasyny çekýär Sözler girişdirmeler, kanallary araşdyrymyz maglumaty Näral şebeke nusgasymyz 73% F1 nokady barýar we işiň üçünji derejesi barýar. Bu täblikde çözmeli atributler hemme görsel bolsa-de, biziň modellerimiz hiç hili surat maglumaty bilen temin edilmedi. netijeler görsel maglumaty textual maglumatdan çykyp biljekdigini görkezýär.', 'am': 'This paper presents the NTU NLP Lab system for the SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes task.  የቃላት አቀማመጥ፣ አስተያየት የሁለተኛ መረጃ (PMI), ConceptNet ዳርቻ እና የአንባቢ መንገድ ርዝመት የጥብቅ መንገድ ርዝመት ለመሠረት የጥያቄ ክፍሎች ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ የኔውራዊ መረብ ሞዴሌያችን በሞከሩ ላይ 73% F1 score ሲደርስ በሥራውም ሦስተኛ ደረጃ ይደረጋል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የሚደረገው የስብሰባዎች ሁሉ የሚያይ ቢሆንም ምሳሌዎቻችን በምስል ዳታ አይሰጡም፡፡ ፍሬዎቹ የራእይ መረጃ ከጽሑፍ ዳታ እንዲመጣ ማሳየት ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'This paper presents the NTU NLP Lab system for the SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes task.  Բառերի ներդրումները, կենտրոնային փոխադարձ տեղեկատվությունը (ՄՄI), Կոնցեպտենթ եզրերը և ամենակարճ ճանապարհի երկարությունը օգտագործվում են որպես ներդրման հատկություններ երկու դասակարգումների կառուցման համար, որպեսզի պարզվի, թե արդյոք առանձնահատկություն Մեր նյարդային ցանցի մոդելը հասնում է 73 տոկոսի F1 գնահատման փորձարկում և դասավորում է առաջադրանքի երրորդը: Չնայած այս խնդրի հետ կապված առանձնահատկությունները բոլորն էլ տեսողական են, մեր մոդելները պատկերի տվյալներով չեն տրամադրվում: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ տեսողական ինֆորմացիան կարող է ստանալ տեքստային տվյալներից:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt NTU NLP Lab sistemini semiEval-2018 üçün Diskriminat Atributların işini alır. Sözlük inşalları, pMI, ConceptNet kenarları və ən qısa yol uzunluğu binar klassifikatları inşa etmək üçün, bir atribut bir cüt fikirlərin müxtəlif olduğunu söyləmək üçün istifadə edilir. Nöral ağ modelimiz sınama qutusunda 73% F1 nöqtəsinə yetirir və işdə üçüncü nöqtəsinə səf verir. Bu işdə çəkilmək üçün müəyyən etdikləri xüsusiyyətlər isə bütün görünüllüdür, modellərimiz heç bir şəkillə verilən məlumatları təmin edilməz. Sonuçlar görünür məlumatı textual məlumatlardan alınabilir.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sistem laboratorije NTU NLP-a za zadatak poluvremenog razdoblja 2018. godine za kapitanje diskriminativnih atributa. Uključenje riječi, usmjereno zajedničke informacije (PMI), ivice koncepcioneta i najkraće dužine puteva koriste se kao ulazne funkcije za izgradnju binarnih klasifikatora kako bi rekli da li je atribut diskriminiran za par koncepta. Naš model neuralne mreže dostiže oko 73% F1 rezultata na testu i reduje 3. u zadatku. Iako su atributi za rješavanje ovog zadatka svi vizualni, naši modeli nisu pruženi podacima o slikama. Rezultati ukazuju na to da vizualne informacije mogu dobiti iz tekstualnih podataka.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta el sistema NTU NLP Lab per a la tasca SemEval-2018 Capturant atributs discriminatoris. Les integracions de paraules, la informació mutua puntual (PMI), els bords de ConceptNet i les llargues de camí més curtes s'utilitzen com característiques d'entrada per construir classificadors binaris per saber si un atributés és discriminatiu per un parell de conceptes. El nostre model de xarxa neural aconsegueix un 73% de puntuació F1 en el conjunt d'exàmens i ranka el tercer en la tasca. Encara que els atributs amb els que tractar en aquesta tasca són visuals, els nostres models no estan proporcionats amb dades d'imatge. The results indicate that visual information can be derived from textual data.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমEval-2018 বৈষম্যিক বৈষম্যের কাজের জন্য NTU NLP ল্যাব সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করেছে। শব্দ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে বাইনারি শ্রেণীবিভাগের বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করার জন্য বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈষম্যমূলক বৈষম্যের জন্য একটি বৈষম্য কিনা বলার জন্য বৈষম্য। আমাদের নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল ৭৩% এফ১ স্কোর পরীক্ষা সেটে পৌঁছায় এবং কাজের তৃতীয় স্কোরে পৌঁছায়। যদিও এই কাজে চুক্তি করার বৈশিষ্ট্য সকল দৃশ্য, আমাদের মডেল কোন ছবির তথ্য প্রদান করা হয়নি। ফলাফল নির্দেশ করে যে টেক্সচুয়াল ডাটা থেকে দৃশ্য তথ্য পাওয়া যাবে।', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje systém NTU NLP Lab pro úlohu SemEval-2018 Zachycování diskriminačních atributů. Vložení slov, bodové vzájemné informace (PMI), hrany ConceptNet a nejkratší délky cesty jsou použity jako vstupní funkce pro sestavení binárních klasifikátorů, které určují, zda je atribut diskriminační pro pár konceptů. Náš model neuronové sítě dosahuje asi 73% F1 skóre na testovací sadě a třetí místo v úkolu. Ačkoli atributy, které se musí v tomto úkolu vypořádat, jsou všechny vizuální, naše modely nejsou poskytovány žádnými obrazovými daty. Výsledky ukazují, že vizuální informace lze odvodit z textových dat.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse NTU NLP Labi süsteemi SemEval-2018 diskrimineerivate atribuutide jäädvustamise ülesandeks. Sisendfunktsioonidena kasutatakse kahendklassifikaatorite loomiseks sõnade manustamist, punktiühist informatsiooni (PMI), ConceptNeti servasid ja lühimaid teepikkusi, et teha kindlaks, kas atribuut on mõne kontseptsiooni jaoks diskrimineeriv. Meie närvivõrgu mudel saavutab testikomplektis 73% F1 skoori ja on ülesandes kolmandal kohal. Kuigi selle ülesande atribuudid on kõik visuaalsed, ei ole meie mudelitel pildiandmeid. Tulemused näitavad, et visuaalset informatsiooni saab tuletada tekstiandmetest.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään NTU NLP Lab -järjestelmä SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes -tehtävään. Sanaupotuksia, pointwise mutual information (PMI), ConceptNet-reunoja ja lyhyitä polkupituuksia käytetään syöteominaisuuksina binaariluokittelijoiden rakentamiseen, jotta voidaan selvittää, onko attribuutti syrjivä käsiteparille. Neuroverkkomallimme saavuttaa testisarjassa noin 73% F1-pisteen ja sijoittuu tehtävässä kolmanneksi. Vaikka tässä tehtävässä käsiteltävät attribuutit ovat kaikki visuaalisia, malleillamme ei ole kuvatietoa. Tulokset osoittavat, että visuaalista tietoa voidaan saada tekstiaineistosta.', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah sing nyimpen nggawe sistem NLP Lab nggo seminval-2008 Capturing Diskrim Attribute task. Word embedding Kernel politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Rejilan ngomong nik akeh Informasi Visual iso ngubah data textual', 'ha': "Wannan avir na bãyar da the NTU NLP Lab system for the SemEV-2018 An yi amfani da maganar da aka saka, masu shiryarwa mai tsawo (Prime I), kantogi na ConceptNet da tsawo masu ƙaranci na hanya masu ƙaranci, za'a yi amfani da su kamar tsarin ayuka masu tsari da darafõfi biyu, don ka sani idan wani halin ya zama mai daidaita wa sauri biyu. Shiryoyinmu na shawarar neural ya kai kodi 73% F1 score kan tsarin jarraba kuma yana sarar da na ukun cikin aikin. Kuma kõ da halin da za'a yi saka cikin wannan aikin, duk su zama mai gani, ba za'a ba da mottoyinmu da wasu data na zane. Matunan na nuna cewa za'a iya samar da information na gane daga data na rubutu.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה את מערכת המעבדה של NTU NLP עבור המשימה של SemEval-2018 לתפוס את התכונות הדיסקרמינציונטיות. Word embeddings, pointwise mutual information (PMI), ConceptNet edges and shortest path lengths are utilized as input features to build binary classifiers to tell whether an attribute is discriminative for a pair of concepts.  מודל הרשת העצבית שלנו מגיע ל-73% נקודת F1 בסט הבדיקות ומצביע את השלישי במשימה. למרות שהתכונות להתמודד עם במשימה הזאת הן כל ויזואליות, הדוגמנים שלנו לא מוספקים עם מידע תמונה. התוצאות מצביעות כי מידע חזותי יכול להיות מווצא ממידע טקסטלי.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen sistem NTU NLP Lab za nalogo SemEval-2018 Capturing Discriminative Attributes. Besedne vdelave, pointwise mutual information (PMI), robovi ConceptNet in najkrajše dolžine poti se uporabljajo kot vhodne funkcije za gradnjo binarnih klasifikatorjev, da ugotovijo, ali je atribut diskriminativen za par konceptov. Naš model nevronskega omrežja doseže približno 73% rezultata F1 na testnem nizu in se uvršča na 3. mesto v nalogi. Čeprav so atributi, ki jih je treba obravnavati pri tej nalogi, vsi vizualni, naši modeli nimajo nobenih slikovnih podatkov. Rezultati kažejo, da je vizualne informacije mogoče izpeljati iz besedilnih podatkov.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་NTU NLP Lab system་ལ་SemEval-2018་ཡི་སྐྱེལ་ཆེན་བྱེད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལ་བཀོད་སྣང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིན། Word embeddings, pointwise mutual information (PMI), ConceptNet edges and shortest path lengths are utilized as input features to build binary classifiers to tell whether an attribute is discriminative for a pair of concepts. ང་ཚོའི་དབུས་མཐུད་དྲ་མ་དབྱིབས་ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཚད་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པ་དང་ལས་ཀ་གཞན་གསུམ་མའི་གྲངས། བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྱེད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དག་ལ་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ང་ཚོའི་མིག མཐོང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཐོག་ནས་མཐོང་ནུས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྙིང་ཐུབ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཤར་བ།'}
{'en': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 11 : Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'ar': 'ELiRF-UPV في SemEval-2018 المهمة 11: فهم الآلة باستخدام معرفة Commonsense', 'fr': "eLIRF-UPV au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 11\xa0: Compréhension automatique à l'aide de Commonsense Knowledge", 'pt': 'ELiRF-UPV na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 11: Compreensão da máquina usando o conhecimento do senso comum', 'es': 'ELIRF-UPV en Semeval-2018 Tarea 11: Comprensión de máquinas mediante el conocimiento de sentido común', 'zh': 'ELiRF-UPV在SemEval-2018务11:用常识之机器', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 11 पर ELiRF-UPV: सामान्य ज्ञान का उपयोग करके मशीन समझ', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のELiRF - UPVタスク11 ：コモンセンスナレッジを使用した機械理解', 'ru': 'ELiRF-UPV на SemEval-2018 Задача 11: Понимание машины с использованием знаний общего смысла', 'ga': 'ELiRF-UPV ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Tuiscint Inneall ag baint úsáide as Commonsense Knowledge', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'ELiRF-UPV a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Comprensione delle macchine utilizzando la conoscenza del Commonsense', 'el': 'Εργασία 11: Κατανόηση μηχανών χρησιμοποιώντας τη γνώση κοινής λογικής', 'hu': 'ELiRF-UPV a SemEval-2018-on 11. feladat: Gépi megértés a Commonsense Knowledge segítségével', 'kk': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'mk': 'ELiRF-UPV на SemEval-2018 задача 11: Машинско разбирање со користење на заедничко знаење', 'ms': 'ELiRF-UPV di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Pemahaman Mesin menggunakan Pengetahuan Komuni', 'lt': 'ELiRF-UPV 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 11 užduotis: Mašinų suvokimas naudojant bendrąsias žinias', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 11: കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ അറിവ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിപാലിക്കുക', 'no': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'mn': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'sr': 'ELiRF-UPV na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: kompresija mašine koristeći znanje Commonsense', 'ro': 'ELiRF-UPV la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 11: Înțelegerea mașinilor utilizând cunoștințele Commonsense', 'pl': 'ELIRF-UPV na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 11: Zrozumienie maszyn z wykorzystaniem wiedzy powszechnej', 'mt': 'ELiRF-UPV f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 11: Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju bl-użu ta’ Għarfien Komuni', 'si': 'ELiRF-UPV at semeval-2018 Job 11: machine Compren', 'sv': 'ELiRF-UPV på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 11: Maskinförståelse med Commonsense Kunskap', 'so': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using isticmaalka aqoonta Commons', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 11: பொறிய அறிவை பயன்படுத்தி இயந்திரம் முடிவு', 'ur': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Công cụ hoàn thiện trên cỗ máy dùng ý thức phổ thông', 'bg': 'Задача 11: Разбиране на машините с помощта на познания за общия разум', 'da': 'ELiRF-UPV ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Maskinforståelse ved hjælp af almindelig viden', 'nl': 'ELIRF-UPV op SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Machine Comprehension met behulp van Commonsense Knowledge', 'hr': 'ELiRF-UPV na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: kompresija strojeva koristeći znanje Commonsense', 'id': 'ELiRF-UPV di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Kompresi Mesin menggunakan Pengetahuan Komunis', 'ko': 'EliRF UPV가SemEval-18 퀘스트 11: 상식 이해 기계 사용', 'fa': 'ELiRF', 'de': 'ELIRF-UPV auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 11: Maschinenverständnis unter Verwendung von Commonse Knowledge', 'tr': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'sw': 'ELiRF-UPV katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 11: Makombozi ya Mashine kwa kutumia Ujuzi wa Siasa', 'af': 'ELiRF-UPV by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 11: Masjienkomprehensie gebruik Commonsense kennis', 'sq': 'ELiRF-UPV në SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'am': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 ስራ 11: Machine Comprehension using Commons Knowledge', 'hy': 'ELiRF-UPV-ը ՍեմԷվալ-2018-ի 11. հանրային գիտելիքների օգտագործման մեքենայի ընկալումը', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ১১: কমানসেন্স জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে মেশিন কম্পিনফেন্স', 'az': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'ca': 'ELiRF-UPV a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'bs': 'ELiRF-UPV na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: kompresija mašine koristeći znanje Commonsense', 'et': 'ELiRF-UPV SemEval-2018 ülesanne 11: masinate mõistmine üldteadmiste abil', 'cs': 'ELIRF-UPV na SemEval-2018 Úkol 11: Porozumění strojů s využitím obecných znalostí', 'fi': 'ELiRF-UPV SemEval-2018 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 11: Koneen ymmärtäminen tavallisella tietämyksellä', 'jv': 'eliRF-UNV at seminval-2008 task 11: Masjid Comprerension use Common Sense knowknowknownMonitor vendor', 'ha': 'ELiRF-UPV at Semevaal-2018 Tanin 11: Mashin Comprehension used by Commonsense Cilmi', 'sk': 'ELiRF-UPV na SemEval-2018 naloga 11: Razumevanje strojev z uporabo splošnega znanja', 'he': 'ELiRF-UPV ב SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Compression using Commonsense Knowledge', 'bo': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the participation of ELiRF-UPV team at task 11, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge, of SemEval-2018. Our approach is based on the use of word embeddings, NumberBatch Embeddings, and a Deep Learning architecture to find the best answer for the multiple-choice questions based on the narrative text. The results obtained are in line with those obtained by the other participants and they encourage us to continue working on this problem.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركة فريق ELiRF-UPV في المهمة 11 ، فهم الآلة باستخدام معرفة المشاع ، في SemEval-2018. يعتمد نهجنا على استخدام حفلات الزفاف ، و NumberBatch Embeddings ، وبنية التعلم العميق للعثور على أفضل إجابة لأسئلة الاختيار من متعدد استنادًا إلى النص السردي. النتائج التي تم الحصول عليها تتماشى مع تلك التي حصل عليها المشاركون الآخرون وهم يشجعوننا على مواصلة العمل على هذه المشكلة.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a participação da equipe ELiRF-UPV na tarefa 11, Compreensão de Máquinas usando Conhecimento Comum, do SemEval-2018. Nossa abordagem é baseada no uso de word embeddings, NumberBatch Embeddings e uma arquitetura de Deep Learning para encontrar a melhor resposta para as perguntas de múltipla escolha com base no texto narrativo. Os resultados obtidos estão de acordo com os obtidos pelos demais participantes e nos incentivam a continuar trabalhando nesse problema.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la participation de l'équipe eLIRF-UPV à la tâche 11, Compréhension automatique à l'aide de Commonsense Knowledge, de SemEval-2018. Notre approche est basée sur l'utilisation d'intégrations de mots, d'intégrations NumberBatch et d'une architecture de Deep Learning pour trouver la meilleure réponse aux questions à choix multiples basées sur le texte narratif. Les résultats obtenus sont conformes à ceux obtenus par les autres participants et nous encouragent à continuer de travailler sur ce problème.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe la participación del equipo de ELIRF-UPV en la tarea 11, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge, de Semeval-2018. Nuestro enfoque se basa en el uso de incrustaciones de palabras, incrustaciones de NumberBatch y una arquitectura de aprendizaje profundo para encontrar la mejor respuesta a las preguntas de opción múltiple basadas en el texto narrativo. Los resultados obtenidos están en línea con los obtenidos por los demás participantes y nos animan a seguir trabajando en este problema.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018のタスク11「共通感覚知識を使用した機械理解」におけるELiRF - UPVチームの参加について説明する。私たちのアプローチは、単語埋め込み、NumberBatch埋め込み、および深層学習アーキテクチャの使用に基づいており、物語のテキストに基づいて複数の質問に最適な答えを見つけることができます。得られた結果は、他の参加者が得た結果と一致しており、この問題に取り組み続けることを奨励しています。', 'zh': '本文述ELiRF-UPV团队参SemEval-2018务11,以常识机器解。 吾法基于用词嵌,数Batch嵌深学架构,以求叙文本之多选择题最佳答案。 得之与他参与者同,勉之勉之。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर कार्य 11 पर ELiRF-UPV टीम की भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है, SemEval-2018 के Commonsense Knowledge का उपयोग करके मशीन कॉम्प्रिहेंशन। हमारा दृष्टिकोण शब्द एम्बेडिंग, NumberBatch Embeddings, और कथा पाठ के आधार पर बहुविकल्पीय प्रश्नों के लिए सबसे अच्छा जवाब खोजने के लिए एक डीप लर्निंग आर्किटेक्चर के उपयोग पर आधारित है। प्राप्त परिणाम अन्य प्रतिभागियों द्वारा प्राप्त किए गए परिणामों के अनुरूप हैं और वे हमें इस समस्या पर काम करना जारी रखने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Эта статья описывает участие команды ELiRF-UPV в задаче 11 «Понимание машины с использованием знаний общего смысла» SemEval-2018. Наш подход основан на использовании вложений слов, вложений NumberBatch и архитектуры глубокого обучения, чтобы найти лучший ответ на вопросы с множественным выбором на основе текста повествования. Полученные результаты согласуются с результатами, полученными другими участниками, и они побуждают нас продолжать работу над этой проблемой.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar rannpháirtíocht fhoireann ELiRF-UPV ag tasc 11, Tuiscint Meaisín ag baint úsáide as Commonsense Knowledge, de SemEval-2018. Tá ár gcur chuige bunaithe ar úsáid leabaithe focal, Leabaithe Uimhir Bhaisc, agus ailtireacht Dhomhainfhoghlama chun an freagra is fearr a fháil ar na ceisteanna ilroghnacha bunaithe ar an téacs insinte. Tá na torthaí a fhaightear ar aon dul leo siúd a fuair na rannpháirtithe eile agus spreagann siad sinn chun leanúint ar aghaidh ag obair ar an bhfadhb seo.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერა ELiRF-UPV ჯგუფის დაწყვეტილება 11-ში, მაქინის კომპრენცია, სამუშაო-2018 სამუშაო კომპრენციაში. ჩვენი პროგრამის გამოყენება სიტყვების გამოყენებაზე, სიტყვების, სიტყვების სიტყვების, და სიტყვების სწავლების აქტიქტიქტურაზე, რომ ძალიან საუკეთესო პასუხისთვის გამოყენება მიღებული წარმოდგენების შესახებ სხვა მოთავსწავლებელების შესახებ და ისინი ჩვენ მოთხოვრობენ დავამუშავოთ ამ პრობლემაზე.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja az ELiRF-UPV csapat részvételét a SemEval-2018 gépi értékelés használatával című 11. feladatában. Megközelítésünk a szóbeágyazások, a NumberBatch beágyazások és a Deep Learning architektúra használatán alapul, hogy megtaláljuk a legjobb választást a többválasztású kérdésekre a narratív szöveg alapján. Az elért eredmények összhangban vannak a többi résztvevő által elért eredményekkel, és arra ösztönöznek minket, hogy folytassuk a munkát ezen a problémán.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή της ομάδας ΕΛiRF-UPV στο έργο 11, Κατανόηση Μηχανών χρησιμοποιώντας Κοινή Γνώση, του SemEval-2018. Η προσέγγισή μας βασίζεται στη χρήση ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, ενσωμάτωσης και μιας αρχιτεκτονικής βαθιάς μάθησης για να βρούμε την καλύτερη απάντηση στις ερωτήσεις πολλαπλών επιλογών με βάση το αφηγηματικό κείμενο. Τα αποτελέσματα που επιτεύχθηκαν είναι σύμφωνα με εκείνα των άλλων συμμετεχόντων και μας ενθαρρύνουν να συνεχίσουμε να εργαζόμαστε πάνω σε αυτό το πρόβλημα.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la partecipazione del team ELiRF-UPV al compito 11, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge, di SemEval-2018. Il nostro approccio si basa sull'uso di embedding di parole, Embedding NumberBatch e un'architettura di Deep Learning per trovare la risposta migliore alle domande a risposta multipla basate sul testo narrativo. I risultati ottenuti sono in linea con quelli ottenuti dagli altri partecipanti e ci incoraggiano a continuare a lavorare su questo problema.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ELiRF-UPV тобының қатынасын 11- тапсырмасында, Commonsense Knowledge, of SemEval-2018 қолданылатын машина компререссиясының қатынасын анықтайды. Біздің тәсіліміз сөздерді ендіру, NumBatch ендіру және қалыпты оқыту архитектурасын қолдану үшін бірнеше таңдау сұрақтарының ең жақсы жауабын табу үшін негізделген. Табылған нәтижелер басқа қатысушылардың жеткізгендерімен сәйкес келеді. Олар бізге осы мәселеге жұмыс істеу үшін көмектеседі.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas ELiRF-UPV grupės dalyvavimas 11 užduotyje „Bendros žinios naudojantis mašinų suvokimas“ SemEval-2018. Mūsų požiūris grindžiamas žodžių įterpimu, numeriniu lotu įterpimu ir gilaus mokymosi architektūra, kad rastume geriausią atsakymą į daugelio pasirinkimo klausimus, pagrįstus narraciniu tekstu. The results obtained are in line with those obtained by the other participants and they encourage us to continue working on this problem.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува учеството на ЕЛИРФ-УПВ тимот на задачата 11, Машинско разбирање користејќи заедничко знаење, од SemEval-2018. Нашиот пристап е базиран на употребата на зборови внатрешни, броеви и архитектура за длабоко учење за да најдеме најдобар одговор за прашањата со повеќе избори базирани на раскажувачкиот текст. Резултатите постигнати се во согласност со оние постигнати од другите учесници и тие не охрабруваат да продолжиме да работиме на овој проблем.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan ketertarikan pasukan ELiRF-UPV pada tugas 11, Pemahaman Mesin menggunakan pengetahuan umum, SemEval-2018. Pendekatan kita berdasarkan penggunaan penyembedding perkataan, Penembedding NumberBatch, dan arkitektur Belajar Dalam Dalam untuk mencari jawapan terbaik untuk soalan pilihan berbilang berdasarkan teks cerita. Hasil yang diperoleh adalah sesuai dengan hasil yang diperoleh oleh peserta lain dan mereka mendorong kita untuk terus bekerja pada masalah ini.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d എലിആര്\u200dഫ്-യുപിവി ടീമിലെ പങ്കെടുപ്പ് വിവരിക്കുന്നു, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2018 ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിശോധനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം വാക്കിന്റെ അകത്തുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d, നമ്പര്\u200dബാച്ച് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d, ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടാര്\u200dക്കും അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. ക മറ്റുള്ള പങ്കാളികള്\u200d ലഭിച്ചവരുടെ കൂടെ സമ്പാദിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d ജോലി ചെയ്യാന്\u200d അവര്\u200d ഞങ്ങളെ പ്', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-parteċipazzjoni tat-tim ELiRF-UPV fil-kompitu 11, Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju bl-użu tal-Għarfien Komuni, ta’ SemEval-2018. L-approċċ tagħna huwa bbażat fuq l-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem, NumberBatch Embeddings, u arkitettura ta’ Tagħlim fil-fond biex issib l-a ħjar tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet b’għażla multipla bbażati fuq it-test narrattiv. Ir-riżultati miksuba huma konformi ma’ dawk miksuba mill-parteċipanti l-oħra u jinkoraġġixxuna nkomplu naħdmu fuq din il-problema.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь ажил 11 дээр ELiRF-UPV багийн оролцоог, Commonsense Knowledge, SemEval-2018-н ашиглаж байгаа Машин Төрөвдүүлэлтийг тайлбарладаг. Бидний ойлголт нь хэлбэрээр нэвтрүүлсэн үг, тооны нэвтрүүлэлт, гүнзгий суралцах архитектур, ойлголтын текст дээр үндсэн олон сонголтын асуултуудын хамгийн сайн хариултыг олох боломжтой. Үүний үр дүн нь бусад оролцогчдын гарсан хүмүүстэй холбоотой. Тэд биднийг энэ асуудлын талаар ажиллаж үргэлжлүүлэхийг хүсэж байна.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje udział zespołu ELIRF-UPV w zadaniu 11, Machine Comprehension with Commonsense Knowledge, SemEval-2018. Nasze podejście opiera się na wykorzystaniu osadzeń słów, osadzeń NumberBatch oraz architektury Deep Learning, aby znaleźć najlepszą odpowiedź na pytania wielokrotnego wyboru w oparciu o tekst narracyjny. Uzyskane wyniki są zgodne z tymi uzyskanymi przez innych uczestników i zachęcają nas do dalszej pracy nad tym problemem.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie participarea echipei ELiRF-UPV la sarcina 11, Înțelegerea mașinilor folosind cunoștințele Commonsense, SemEval-2018. Abordarea noastră se bazează pe utilizarea încorporărilor de cuvinte, a încorporărilor NumberBatch și a arhitecturii Deep Learning pentru a găsi cel mai bun răspuns la întrebările cu răspuns multiplu bazate pe textul narativ. Rezultatele obținute sunt în concordanță cu cele obținute de ceilalți participanți și ne încurajează să continuăm să lucrăm la această problemă.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver deltakaren av ELiRF-UPV-gruppa på oppgåva 11, Machine Comprehension med Commonsense Knowledge, av SemEval-2018. Tilnærminga vårt er basert på bruk av ordinnbygging, innbygging av nummerBatch og ein dyp læringsarkitektur for å finna den beste svara for dei fleire val spørsmålene basert på den historiske teksten. Resultatene som er oppteken er i line med dei som er oppteken av dei andre deltakarane, og dei encouragerer oss å fortsette å arbeide på dette problemet.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje ELiRF-UPV tima na zadatku 11, komprenzija mašine koristeći znanje Commonsense, od semiEval-2018. Naš pristup je baziran na korištenju reèi ugraðenja, integracija brojeva brojeva i arhitektura dubokog učenja da pronaðemo najbolji odgovor na pitanja više izbora na temelju priče. Dobili su rezultati u skladu sa onima koje su dobili drugi sudionici i ohrabruju nas da nastavimo raditi na ovom problemu.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුවේ ELiRF-UPV කණ්ඩායමේ සම්පූර්ණය 11 වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ දන්නවන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමග සම්පූර් අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය තමයි වචන සංවේශනය, අංක බැච් සංවේශනය, හා ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න සංවේශනය හොයාගන්න හොඳම උත්තර හොයාගන්න. ගත්ත ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay qayb ka qeybqaadashada kooxda ELiRF-UPV shaqada 11, Machine Comprehension using aqoonta Commonsance, SemEval-2018. Dhaqsadeennu waxay ku saleysan yihiin isticmaalka hadalka, qalabka lambarada, iyo dhismaha dhismaha hoose ee waxbarashada si aad u hesho jawaabta ugu wanaagsan ee su'aalaha doorashada badan ee ku saleysan warqada taariikhda. Midhaha la soo helay waxay la mid yihiin kuwa ka qayb galay, waxayna nagu dhiirrigeliyaan inaan sii shaqeyno dhibaatadan.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver ELiRF-UPV-gruppens deltagande i uppgift 11, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge, SemEval-2018. Vårt tillvägagångssätt bygger på användning av ordinbäddningar, NumberBatch Embeddings och en Deep Learning arkitektur för att hitta det bästa svaret på flervalsfrågorna baserat på narrativ text. De resultat som erhållits är i linje med de resultat som erhållits av de andra deltagarna och de uppmuntrar oss att fortsätta arbeta med detta problem.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ELiRF- UPV குழுவின் பகிர்ந்தளிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது செம்Eval- 2018 சார்ந்த அறிவை பயன்படுத்தி இயந்திரம் முழுமையாக்கம். நம்முடைய அணுகல் வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கம், எண் பேச் உடையகங்கள், மற்றும் ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் கட்டுக்காட்டியின் சிறந்த பதில் காணவேண்டும் பல தேர் பெற்ற முடிவுகள் மற்ற பங்குக் கூட்டாளிகளால் கிடைத்தவர்களுடன் வரிசையாக இருக்கிறது மற்றும் அவர்கள் எங்களை இந்த பி', 'ur': 'This paper describes the participation of ELiRF-UPV team at task 11, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge, of SemEval-2018. ہمارا طریقہ لفظوں کے استعمال پر بنیاد ہے، نرمر بچ انڈینگ، اور ایک عمیق سیکھنے کی معماری بنائی ہے تاکہ کہانیاں کے متعلق بہترین انتخاب سوال کے بہترین جواب پائیں. جو نتیجے حاصل کئے گئے ہیں ان کے ساتھ جو دوسرے مشرکین سے حاصل کئے گئے ہیں اور وہ ہمیں اس مسئلہ پر کام ادھر کرنے کی تشویق دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval-2018 tashkilotida ELiRF-UPV guruhning qismini anglatadi. Bizning fikrimiz qismlar matn asosida bir necha tanlangan savollar uchun eng yaxshi javob topish uchun so'zlar, Number Batch Emiliyatlarining foydalanishi asosida. The results obtained are in line with those obtained by the other participants and they encourage us to continue working on this problem.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả sự tham gia của đội viễn RF-UPV tại "Task 11, Machine Compention using Commonwealth knowledge", của SemEvol. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi dựa trên việc sử dụng những từ nhúng vào, Các TÔi số Batch, và một kiến trúc về học sâu để tìm câu trả lời tốt nhất cho các câu hỏi đa lựa chọn dựa trên văn bản cốt truyện. Kết quả khớp với kết quả của những người khác và họ thúc đẩy chúng ta tiếp tục nghiên cứu vấn đề này.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва участието на екипа на ЕИРФ-УПВ в задача 11, Разбиране на машините с помощта на общоприето знание, на СемЕвал-2018. Нашият подход се основава на използването на вграждания на думи, вграждания на номера и архитектура за задълбочено обучение, за да намерите най-добрия отговор на въпросите с многократен избор въз основа на разказващия текст. Получените резултати са в съответствие с получените от останалите участници и ни насърчават да продължим да работим по този проблем.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de deelname van ELIRF-UPV team aan taak 11, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge, van SemEval-2018. Onze aanpak is gebaseerd op het gebruik van woord embeddings, NumberBatch Embeddings en een Deep Learning architectuur om het beste antwoord te vinden op de meerkeuzevragen op basis van de verhalende tekst. De behaalde resultaten zijn in overeenstemming met die van de andere deelnemers en ze moedigen ons aan om verder te werken aan dit probleem.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver ELiRF-UPV-holdets deltagelse i opgave 11, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge, SemEval-2018. Vores tilgang er baseret på brug af ordindlejringer, NumberBatch Embeddings og en Deep Learning arkitektur for at finde det bedste svar på flere valgmuligheder baseret på fortællingsteksten. De opnåede resultater er i overensstemmelse med resultaterne fra de øvrige deltagere, og de opfordrer os til at fortsætte arbejdet med dette problem.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan parteċipasi tim ELiRF-UPV di tugas 11, Comprehension Mesin menggunakan Pengetahuan Komunis, dari SemEval-2018. Pendekatan kita berdasarkan penggunaan penyembedding kata, NumberBatch Embeddings, dan arsitektur belajar dalam untuk menemukan jawaban terbaik untuk pertanyaan pilihan berbilang berdasarkan teks narratif. Hasil yang diperoleh sesuai dengan hasil yang diperoleh oleh peserta lainnya dan mereka mendorong kita untuk terus bekerja pada masalah ini.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die Beteiligung des ELIRF-UPV Teams an Aufgabe 11, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge, von SemEval-2018. Unser Ansatz basiert auf der Verwendung von Wort-Einbettungen, NumberBatch-Einbettungen und einer Deep Learning-Architektur, um die beste Antwort auf die Multiple-Choice-Fragen basierend auf dem narrativen Text zu finden. Die erzielten Ergebnisse entsprechen denen der anderen Teilnehmer und ermutigen uns, weiter an diesem Problem zu arbeiten.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje učestvovanje ELiRF-UPV tima na zadatku 11, komprehenzija mašine koristeći znanje Commonsense, od semiEval-2018. Naš pristup je baziran na upotrebi riječi ugrađenja, udruženja brojeva brojeva i arhitektura dubokog učenja kako bi pronašli najbolji odgovor na pitanja višeizbornih pitanja na temelju priče. Dobili su rezultati u skladu s onima koje su dobili ostali sudionici i poticaju nas da nastavimo raditi na tom problemu.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت تیم ELiRF-UPV را در کار ۱۱ توصیف می\u200cکند، تأکید ماشین با استفاده از دانش Commonsense، از نیم Eval-2018. روش ما بر اساس استفاده از استفاده از کلمات ابتدایی، ابتدایی شماره بچ، و یک معماری یادگیری عمیق برای پیدا کردن بهترین پاسخ برای سوالات چندین انتخاب بر اساس متن داستان است. نتیجه\u200cهای دریافت شده با کسانی که توسط بقیه شرکتگران دریافت شده\u200cاند، مرتبط هستند و ما را تشویق می\u200cکنند که بر این مشکل ادامه دهیم.', 'ko': "본고는 EliRF UPV팀이SemEval-18 미션 11에 참여한'상식지식이해기계'의 상황을 묘사한다.우리의 방법은 단어 삽입, NumberBatch 삽입과 심도 있는 학습 구조를 바탕으로 서사 텍스트에 따라 여러 선택 문제의 가장 좋은 답안을 찾을 수 있다.결과는 다른 참가자들의 결과와 일치했고, 그들은 우리가 이 문제를 계속 연구하도록 격려했다.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ushiriki wa timu ya ELiRF-UPV katika kazi 11, Makusanyiko ya Mashiniki kwa kutumia ujuzi wa Mawasiliano, wa SemEval-2018. Hatua yetu inatokana na matumizi ya maneno yanayotumika, Makampuni ya Ndugu, na majengo ya Kufundisha Kusini ili kutafuta jibu bora zaidi kwa maswali ya chaguo kadhaa yanayohusiana na maandishi ya simulizi. Matokeo yaliyopata yanalinganishwa na wale waliopatiwa na washiriki wengine na wanatuhamasisha kuendelea kufanya kazi katika tatizo hili.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz ELiRF-UPV toparyň görevidiň 11-nji, Maşynyň birleşigini Commonsense Knowledge, of SemEval-2018 tarapynda goşulýar. Biziň ýaryşymyz söz integrasy, SaylawBatch integrasy we çykyş öwrenmek arhitekturumyň ýokary çykyş metinä daýalan sözleriniň iň gowy jogabyny tapmak üçin daýanýar. Görünen netijeler diğer iştirakçiler tarafından berilen kişilerle çözüldir we bu meselede işlememizi devam etmemizi ruhlandyrdylar.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die deelnadering van ELiRF-UPV-team by taak 11, Masjien Komprênsie gebruik Commonsense Knowledge, van SemEval-2018. Ons toegang is gebaseer op die gebruik van woord inbettings, NumberBatch inbettings, en 'n Deep Leer-arkitektuur om die beste antwoord te vind vir die veelvuldige keuse vrae gebaseer op die narratiewe teks. Die ontvangde resultate is in lyn met die wat deur die ander deelnaders ontvang is, en hulle moet ons voortgaan om op hierdie probleem te werk.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan pjesëmarrjen e ekipit ELiRF-UPV në detyrën 11, Komprehimin e Makinës duke përdorur njohuritë e përbashkëta, të SemEval-2018. Përqasja jonë është bazuar në përdorimin e përfshirjeve të fjalëve, NumberBatch Embeddings dhe një arkitekturë të Mësimit të thellë për të gjetur përgjigjen më të mirë për pyetjet me zgjedhje të shumta bazuar në tekstin tregues. Rezultatet e fituara janë në përputhje me ato të fituara nga pjesëmarrësit e tjerë dhe ata na inkurajojnë të vazhdojmë të punojmë mbi këtë problem.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է ELiRF-UPV թիմի մասնակցությունը 11-րդ խնդիրում, Մեքենայի ընկալումը օգտագործելով համայնական գիտելիքը, ՍեմԵվալ-2018-ի: Մեր մոտեցումը հիմնված է բառերի ներգրավման, թվային հատվածների ներգրավման և խորը սովորելու ճարտարապետության վրա, որպեսզի գտնենք բազմաթիվ ընտրության հարցերի լավագույն պատասխանը, հիմնված պատմության տեքստի վրա: Այս արդյունքները համապատասխանում են մյուս մասնակիցների կողմից ստացած արդյունքներին, և նրանք խրախուսում են մեզ շարունակել աշխատել այս խնդրի վրա:', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የELiRF-UPV ቡድን በስራ 11፣ የሴmEval-2018 የመኪን እውቀት የተጠቃሚ ማሻሻን ድምፅ ይናገራል፡፡ የቃላችን አቀማመጥ፣ ቁጥር ባርክ እልፍት እና የጥልቅ ትምህርት መሠረት በመጠቀም ለብዙ ምርጫ ጥያቄዎች ጥያቄ ለመግኘት ነው፡፡ ፍሬዎቹ ከሌሎቹ ተጋሪዎች ጋር ይደረጋሉ፤ የዚህንም ጉዳይ ላይ ለመሥራት እንሞክራለን፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 11-ci görevdə ELiRF-UPV takımının paylaşışılığını, Commonsense Knowledge, SemEval-2018 ilə istifadə edir. Bizim tərəfimiz sözləri, Num Batch İnterəfiyyələri və bir Deep Learning arhitektarının istifadəsinə dayandırılmasına görə çoxlu seçim suallarının ən yaxşı cavabını tapmaq üçün. Qazanmış sonuçlar digər iştirakçıların qazandığı şəxslərlə bərabər idi və onlar bizi bu problem ə istifadə etməyə məcbur edirlər.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে ইলিআরএফ-উপিভি দলের অংশগ্রহণের ব্যাখ্যা করছে সেমইভাল-২০১৮-এর কমিউনিসেন্স জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে মেশিন কম্পিনফেন্সেশনের ১১ আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা হলো শব্দ ব্যবহার, নম্বার্চ ব্যাচ এমবেডিং এবং গভীর শিক্ষা প্রতিষ্ঠানের উপর ভিত্তিতে বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক প্রশ্নের জন্য অনেক ভ এর ফলাফল অন্যান্য অংশগ্রহণকারীদের সাথে যুক্ত এবং তারা আমাদেরকে এই সমস্যার উপর কাজ করতে উৎসাহিত করে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje ELiRF-UPV tima na zadatku 11, komprenzija mašine koristeći znanje Commonsense, od semiEval-2018. Naš pristup je baziran na korištenju riječi ugrađenja, udruženja brojeva brojeva, i arhitektura dubokog učenja da pronađemo najbolji odgovor na pitanja više izbora na temelju priče. Dobili su rezultati u skladu sa onima koje su dobili drugi sudionici i oni nas ohrabruju da nastavimo raditi na ovom problemu.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu la participació de l'equip ELiRF-UPV a la tasca 11, Comprensió de màquines utilitzant el Coneixement Comun, de SemEval-2018. El nostre enfocament es basa en l'ús de paraules incorporades, NumberBatch Embeddings i una arquitectura d'Aprendiment Profund per trobar la millor resposta a les preguntes d'opció múltiple basades en el text narratiu. The results obtained are in line with those obtained by the other participants and they encourage us to continue working on this problem.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje účast týmu ELIRF-UPV na úkolu 11, Machine Comprehension with Commonsense Knowledge, SemEval-2018. Náš přístup je založen na použití vložení slov, vložení NumberBatch a architektury hlubokého učení k nalezení nejlepší odpovědi na otázky s více výběrem založené na vyprávěném textu. Získané výsledky jsou v souladu s výsledky ostatních účastníků a povzbuzují nás, abychom na tomto problému pokračovali.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse ELiRF-UPV meeskonna osalemist SemEval-2018 ülesandes 11 "Masinamõistmine üldise mõistmise abil". Meie lähenemisviis põhineb sõna manustamisel, NumberBatch manustamisel ja sügavõppe arhitektuuril, et leida narratiivse teksti põhjal parim vastus mitme valikuga küsimustele. Saadud tulemused on kooskõlas teiste osalejate saadud tulemustega ja julgustavad meid selle probleemiga edasi töötama.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan ELiRF-UPV-tiimin osallistumista SemEval-2018:n tehtävään 11, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. Lähestymistapamme perustuu sanaupotusten, NumberBatch-upotusten ja Deep Learning -arkkitehtuurin käyttöön löytääksemme parhaan vastauksen kerronnan perusteella monivalintakysymyksiin. Saadut tulokset vastaavat muiden osallistujien saamia tuloksia, ja ne kannustavat meitä jatkamaan tämän ongelman käsittelyä.', 'jv': 'This paper description the partition of eliRF-UNV group at task 11, Device Compréncion use Common Sensitive knowknowness, of semebal-2008. Ndoleh dhéwé wis basa ning gambar kelas embedding word, embedding number Batch, lan architecture deep Jaman sing dipun ngobro sing dumadhi iki dadi sing luwih nggawe ngulinakake maneh lan nganggep nggunakake awak dhéwé njaluk usul kanggo ngilangno iki.', 'ha': 'Wannan karatun na describe the role of ELiRF-UPV team at job 11, Machine Comprehension used by Commonsense Cilm, of SemEl-2018. Mataimakinmu ne a kan amfani da masu amfani da maganar da aka shigar da kwanan kwanan, da kuma an kasa matsayin Hakima da Deƙas Learni dõmin ya sãmi masu kyaun jabu wa masu son-zaɓen masu yawa a kan matsayin faɗi. Matarin da aka sãmu yana sami da waɗanda na sami biyu suka sami kuma sunã kwaɗaitar mu daza mu yi aiki a kan wannan mataimaki.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisano sodelovanje ekipe ELiRF-UPV pri nalogi 11, Razumevanje strojev z uporabo splošnega znanja, SemEval-2018. Naš pristop temelji na uporabi besednih vdelav, vdelav NumberBatch in arhitekture globokega učenja, da bi našli najboljši odgovor na vprašanja z več izbirami na podlagi pripovednega besedila. Dobljeni rezultati so v skladu s tistimi, ki so jih pridobili drugi udeleženci, in nas spodbujajo k nadaljnjemu delu na tem problemu.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את השתתפות של צוות ELiRF-UPV במשימה 11, הבנה מכונת בשימוש ידע משותף, של SemEval-2018. הגישה שלנו מבוססת על השימוש בתכניות מילים, בתכניות מספריות, וארכיטקטורה ללמוד עמוק כדי למצוא את התשובה הטובה ביותר לשאלות בחרות רבות מבוססת על הטקסט הסיפורי. התוצאות שנקבלו מתאימות לאלה שנקבלו על ידי השתתפים האחרים והם מעודדים אותנו להמשיך לעבוד על הבעיה הזאת.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ELiRF-UPV མིའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་(task 11)དང་། Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge, of SemEval-2018 ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་འབྲི་ཚིག་ཚང་བཅུག་པ་དང་། ཨང་ཀིBatch སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པ་ཚོའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩོད་པ་ཞིག གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ཡོད་པའི་གྲངས་འབྲས་ནི་ཞུགས་སྐྱེལ་གཞན་པ་ཚོ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11 : An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'fr': "YNU_Deep au SEMEVAL-2018 Task 11\xa0: Un ensemble de modèles BilsTM basés sur l'attention pour la compréhension des machines", 'es': 'YNU_Deep en Semeval-2018 Tarea 11: Un conjunto de modelos BilsTM basados en la atención para la comprensión de máquinas', 'ar': 'YNU_Deep في SemEval-2018 المهمة 11: مجموعة من نماذج BiLSTM القائمة على الانتباه لفهم الآلة', 'pt': 'YNU_Deep em SemEval-2018 Tarefa 11: Um conjunto de modelos BiLSTM baseados em atenção para compreensão de máquina', 'zh': 'YNU_DeepäºŽSemEval-2018åŠ¡11:åŸºäºŽBiLSTMå½¢ä¹‹ä¼š,ä»¥æœºå™¨çŸ¥ä¹‹', 'ja': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval -2018タスク11 ：機械理解のためのアテンションベースのBiLSTMモデルのアンサンブル', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 11 पर YNU_Deep: मशीन समझ के लिए ध्यान-आधारित BiLSTM मॉडल का एक पहनावा', 'ru': 'YNU_Deep на SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'ga': 'YNU_Deep ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Ensemble de Mhúnlaí BiLSTM Bunaithe ar Aird le haghaidh Tuiscint Meaisíní', 'hu': 'YNU_Deep a SemEval-2018 11. feladat: Figyelem alapú BiLSTM modellek együttese a gépek megértéséhez', 'el': 'Εργασία 11: Ένα σύνολο μοντέλων βασισμένων στην προσοχή για την κατανόηση μηχανών', 'ka': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'it': "YNU_Deep a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Un insieme di modelli BiLSTM basati sull'attenzione per la comprensione delle macchine", 'lt': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-Based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'kk': 'YNU_Deep at semiEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'mk': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-Based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'ms': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 11- ല്\u200d യുന്\u200dയൂ ആഴത്തില്\u200d: മെഷീന്\u200d പുതുക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റം', 'mt': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'mn': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'pl': 'YNU_Deep w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 11: Zespół modeli BiLSTM opartych na uwadze dla zrozumienia maszyn', 'ro': 'YNU_Deep la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 11: Un ansamblu de modele BiLSTM bazate pe atenție pentru înțelegerea mașinilor', 'sr': 'YNU_Deep at semiEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'si': 'YNu_Deep at Halfeval-2018 Job 11: an Ensemble of Attension-based BiLSTM Models for machine Comprevension', 'so': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'sv': 'YNU_Deep på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 11: En samling uppmärksamhetsbaserade BiLSTM-modeller för maskinförståelse', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியின் ஆழம் ஆழம்:', 'ur': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'no': 'YNU_Deep at semiEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tập trung trung trung vào SemEvl-tê 8 Task 11: An Ensemble of Chú ý-Dựa-BiLSTM Models for Machine Compention', 'bg': 'Задача 11: Ансамбъл от модели за разбиране на машините, базирани на вниманието', 'da': 'YNU_Deep på SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Et sæt af opmærksomhedsbaserede BiLSTM modeller til maskinforståelse', 'nl': 'YNU_Deep bij SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Een ensemble van op aandacht gebaseerde BiLSTM-modellen voor machineinzicht', 'id': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'de': 'YNU_Deep bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 11: Ein Ensemble aufmerksamkeitsbasierter BiLSTM-Modelle für Maschinenverständnis', 'hr': 'YNU_Deep at semiEval-2018 Task 11: Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'ko': 'YNU Deep이SemEval-18 퀘스트 11: 주의력 기반의 기계 이해 BilSTM 모형', 'fa': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: an Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'tr': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'sw': 'YNU_Deep katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 11: Uthibitisho wa Modeli za BiLSTM kwa ajili ya Ufunuzi wa Mashine', 'af': "YNU_Deep by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 11: ' n Ensemble van aandag-gebaseerde BiLSTM Modelle vir Masjien Komprimensie", 'sq': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-Based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'hy': 'Ynu_Deep in Halewal-2018', 'am': 'የYNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'az': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'ca': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১১-এ ইয়ানইউ_ডিপ: মেশিনের পুনরুদ্ধারের জন্য একটি আকর্ষণীয় বিএলস্টিম মডেল', 'bs': 'YNU_Deep at semiEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'cs': 'YNU_Deep na SemEval-2018 Úkol 11: Soubor BiLSTM modelů založených na pozornosti pro porozumění strojů', 'fi': 'YNU_Deep SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 11: Huomioon perustuvien BiLSTM-mallien joukko koneymmärrystä varten', 'et': 'YNU_Deep SemEval-2018 ülesandel 11: Tähelepanupõhiste BiLSTM mudelite ansambel masinate mõistmiseks', 'jv': 'YNU', 'ha': 'YNU_Dedep at SemEV-2018 Tafiyar 11: An Ensemble of AttAttitory-based BiLStM Models for Comprehension by Machine', 'he': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-Based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension', 'sk': 'YNU_Deep na SemEval-2018 naloga 11: Skupina modelov BiLSTM, ki temeljijo na pozornosti, za razumevanje strojev', 'bo': 'YNU_Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 11: An Ensemble of Attention-based BiLSTM Models for Machine Comprehension'}
{'en': 'We firstly use GloVe to learn the distributed representations automatically from the instance, question and answer triples. Then an attentionbased Bidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) model is used to encode the triples. We also perform a simple ensemble method to improve the effectiveness of our model. The system we developed obtains an encouraging result on this task. It achieves the accuracy 0.7472 on the test set. We rank 5th according to the official ranking.', 'ar': 'نستخدم GloVe أولاً لمعرفة التمثيلات الموزعة تلقائيًا من المثيلات والسؤال والأجوبة الثلاثية. ثم يتم استخدام نموذج LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه قائم على الانتباه (BiLSTM) لترميز الثلاثيات. نقوم أيضًا بتنفيذ طريقة تجميع بسيطة لتحسين فعالية نموذجنا. حصل النظام الذي قمنا بتطويره على نتيجة مشجعة في هذه المهمة. يحقق دقة 0.7472 في مجموعة الاختبار. نحن نحتل المرتبة الخامسة وفقًا للترتيب الرسمي.', 'es': 'En primer lugar, utilizamos GloVe para aprender las representaciones distribuidas automáticamente a partir de las triples de instancia, pregunta y respuesta. Luego, se utiliza un modelo LSTM bidireccional basado en la atención (BilSTM) para codificar las tripletas. También realizamos un método de ensamblaje simple para mejorar la eficacia de nuestro modelo. El sistema que desarrollamos obtiene un resultado alentador en esta tarea. Alcanza la precisión de 0.7472 en el conjunto de pruebas. Estamos en el quinto lugar según el ranking oficial.', 'pt': 'Em primeiro lugar, usamos o GloVe para aprender as representações distribuídas automaticamente dos triplos de instância, pergunta e resposta. Em seguida, um modelo LSTM bidirecional baseado em atenção (BiLSTM) é usado para codificar as triplas. Também realizamos um método de conjunto simples para melhorar a eficácia do nosso modelo. O sistema que desenvolvemos obtém um resultado animador nesta tarefa. Atinge a precisão de 0,7472 no conjunto de teste. Estamos em 5º lugar de acordo com o ranking oficial.', 'fr': "Nous utilisons Glove pour apprendre automatiquement les représentations distribuées à partir des triplets d'instance, de question et de réponse. Ensuite, un modèle LSTM bidirectionnel basé sur l'attention (BilsTM) est utilisé pour coder les triplets. Nous appliquons également une méthode d'ensemble simple pour améliorer l'efficacité de notre modèle. Le système que nous avons développé obtient un résultat encourageant dans cette tâche. Il atteint la précision 0,7472 sur le jeu de test. Nous nous classons 5e selon le classement officiel.", 'ja': 'まず、GloVeを使用して、インスタンスから分散表現を自動的に学習し、3つの質問と回答を行います。次に、注意に基づく双方向LSTM （ BiLSTM ）モデルを使用して、トリプルを符号化します。また、モデルの有効性を向上させるために、シンプルなアンサンブルメソッドを実行します。私たちが開発したシステムは、このタスクで奨励される結果を得ます。試験器の精度0.7472を実現します。公式ランキングでは5位にランクインしている。', 'zh': '先用 GloVe 例、问答三元组自学分布式示。 然后用双向 LSTM (BiLSTM) 象编码三元组。 又行一简之法以崇模有效性。 吾所以开者,取令人鼓舞于此也。 试台致0.7472之精。 据官方排名,我们排名第5位。', 'hi': 'हम सबसे पहले GloVe का उपयोग करने के लिए उदाहरण, सवाल और जवाब ट्रिपल से स्वचालित रूप से वितरित अभ्यावेदन जानने के लिए. फिर एक ध्यान आधारित द्विदिश LSTM (BiLSTM) मॉडल ट्रिपल एन्कोड करने के लिए उपयोग किया जाता है। हम अपने मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता में सुधार करने के लिए एक सरल पहनावा विधि भी करते हैं। हमारे द्वारा विकसित प्रणाली इस कार्य पर एक उत्साहजनक परिणाम प्राप्त करती है। यह परीक्षण सेट पर 0.7472 सटीकता प्राप्त करता है। हम आधिकारिक रैंकिंग के अनुसार 5 वें स्थान पर हैं।', 'ru': 'Сначала мы используем GloVe для автоматического изучения распределенных представлений из трех экземпляров, вопросов и ответов. Затем для кодирования тройки используется двунаправленная модель LSTM (BiLSTM), основанная на фокусировке. Мы также выполняем простой ансамблевый метод для повышения эффективности нашей модели. Разработанная нами система дает обнадеживающий результат в решении этой задачи. Он достигает точности 0,7472 на испытательном комплекте. Мы занимаем 5-е место в официальном рейтинге.', 'ga': "Ar dtús bainimid úsáid as GloVe chun na huiríll dáilte a fhoghlaim go huathoibríoch ó na trí shamplaí, ceisteanna agus freagraí. Ansin úsáidtear samhail déthreorach LSTM (BiLSTM) atá bunaithe ar aird chun na triples a ionchódú. Déanaimid modh ensemble simplí freisin chun éifeachtacht ár múnla a fheabhsú. Faigheann an córas a d'fhorbair muid toradh spreagúil ar an tasc seo. Baineann sé an cruinneas 0.7472 amach ar an tacar tástála. Táimid sa 5ú háit de réir an rangú oifigiúil.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ პირველად Glove-ს გამოყენებთ, რომ ავტომატურად გავუწეროთ გაყოფილი გამოსახულებების შესახებ, კითხვების და სამჯერ განსახულებების შესახებ. შემდეგ დაახლოებით ორდირექციონალური LSTM (BiLSTM) მოდელი გამოყენება სამჯერ კოდირებად. ჩვენ მოდელის ეფექტიურობის უფრო მეტი გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ განვითარებული სისტემა მიიღება ამ რაოდენობაში მოწყვეტილი შედეგი. ეს იქნება წარმოდგენება 0,7472 ტესტის სეტის წარმოდგენება. ჩვენ მეხუთე წერტილის მიმართლად დავალებით.', 'el': 'Αρχικά χρησιμοποιούμε το GloVe για να μάθουμε αυτόματα τις κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις από τα τριπλάσια περιστατικά, τις ερωτήσεις και τις απαντήσεις. Στη συνέχεια, ένα μοντέλο με βάση την προσοχή χρησιμοποιείται για την κωδικοποίηση των τριπλών. Επίσης, εφαρμόζουμε μια απλή μέθοδο συνόλου για να βελτιώσουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του μοντέλου μας. Το σύστημα που αναπτύξαμε επιτυγχάνει ενθαρρυντικό αποτέλεσμα σε αυτό το έργο. Επιτυγχάνει την ακρίβεια 0.7472 στο σύνολο δοκιμής. Καταχωρούμε 5η σύμφωνα με την επίσημη κατάταξη.', 'hu': 'Először is a GloVe-t használjuk, hogy automatikusan megtanuljuk az elosztott reprezentációkat a példányból, kérdésekből és válaszokból. Ezután egy figyelem alapú kétirányú LSTM (BiLSTM) modellt használunk a hármas kódolására. Modellünk hatékonyságának javítása érdekében egyszerű együttes módszert is végezünk. Az általunk kifejlesztett rendszer bátorító eredményt ér el ebben a feladatban. Eléri a pontosságot 0,7472 a tesztkészleten. A hivatalos rangsor szerint az ötödik helyen vagyunk.', 'it': "In primo luogo usiamo GloVe per imparare automaticamente le rappresentazioni distribuite dalle istanze, domande e risposte triple. Quindi un modello bidirezionale LSTM (BiLSTM) basato sull'attenzione viene utilizzato per codificare i tripli. Eseguiamo anche un semplice metodo di ensemble per migliorare l'efficacia del nostro modello. Il sistema che abbiamo sviluppato ottiene un risultato incoraggiante su questo compito. Raggiunge la precisione 0,7472 sul set di prova. Siamo al quinto posto secondo la classifica ufficiale.", 'kk': 'Біріншіден Glove дегенді автоматты түрде таратылған кескіндерді, сұрақ және үш жауап беру үшін үйренеміз. Содан кейін қарау негіздеген екі бағытты LSTM (BiLSTM) үш бағытты кодтау үшін қолданылады. Мұндай-ақ біз үлгіміздің эффективнігін жақсарту үшін қарапайым сәйкестік әдісін жасаймыз. Біз жасаған жүйе осы тапсырманың көмектесу нәтижесін алады. Бұл сынақтағы 0,7472 дұрыстығын жеткізеді. Біз әкімшілік жолдарына сәйкес 5-ші жолдарық.', 'mk': 'Прво користиме GloVe за да ги научиме дистрибуираните претставувања автоматски од инстанцијата, прашањето и одговорот трипати. Then an attentionbased Bidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) model is used to encode the triples.  We also perform a simple ensemble method to improve the effectiveness of our model.  Системот што го развивме добива охрабрувачки резултат на оваа задача. Добива точност 0,7472 на тестот. Ние се рангираме на 5 по официјалното рангирање.', 'lt': 'Pirmiausia mes naudojame GloVe, kad išsiaiškintume paskirstytus atstovus automatiškai iš instancijos, klausimų ir atsakymų trigubai. Tuomet trigubai koduoti naudojamas dėmesiu pagrįstas dvikryptis LSTM (BiLSTM) model is. Mes taip pat atliekame paprastą komplekso metodą, kad pagerintume mūsų modelio veiksmingumą. Sistema, kurią sukūrėme, gauna skatinamą rezultatą šioje užduotyje. Bandymų rinkinyje tikslumas 0,7472. Mes klasifikuojame penktą pagal oficialią klasifikaciją.', 'ms': 'Kami pertama-tama menggunakan GloVe untuk belajar perwakilan yang disebarkan secara automatik dari contoh, soalan dan jawapan tiga kali. Kemudian model LSTM (BiLSTM) berdasarkan perhatian digunakan untuk mengekod tiga. Kami juga melakukan kaedah ensemble sederhana untuk meningkatkan efektivitas model kami. Sistem yang kami bina dapat hasil yang menyeronokkan dalam tugas ini. Ia mencapai ketepatan 0.7472 pada set ujian. We rank 5th according to the official ranking.', 'ml': 'ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d ഗ്ലോവിയെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് വിതരണ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d സ്വയമായി പഠിക്കാനാണ്. ഉദാഹരണത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ചോദ് പിന്നീട് ഒരു ശ്രദ്ധ ബൈഡഡഷണല്\u200d LSTM (ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റം) മോഡല്\u200d മൂന്നില്\u200d കോഡ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ മാര്\u200dഗം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വികസിച്ച സിസ്റ്റം ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരു ആശ്വാസകരമായ ഫലം ലഭിക്കുന്നു. ടെസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d 0. 7472 ന്റെ ശരിയാണ് അത് എത്തുന്നത്. ഓഫീസല്\u200d റാങ്ങിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ അനുസരിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d അഞ്ചാം നില്\u200dക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'L-ewwel nett nużaw GloVe biex nitgħallmu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti awtomatikament mill-istanza, mistoqsijiet u tweġibiet tripli. Imbagħad jintuża mudell ta’ LSTM Bidirezzjonali (BiLSTM) ibbażat fuq l-attenzjoni biex jiġi kkodifikat it-triplu. Inwettqu wkoll metodu sempliċi ta’ ensemble biex itejbu l-effettività tal-mudell tagħna. Is-sistema li żviluppajna tikseb riżultat inkoraġġanti dwar dan il-kompitu. It achieves the accuracy 0.7472 on the test set.  We rank 5th according to the official ranking.', 'mn': 'Эхлээд бид Glove-г автоматаар хуваагдсан үзүүлэлтийг автоматаар суралцах хэрэгтэй. Дараа нь анхаарлын үндсэн хоёр шугам LSTM (BiLSTM) загвар гурав дахь шинжлэх ухааны тулд хэрэглэгддэг. Бид мөн загварын үр дүнг сайжруулахын тулд энгийн загвар хийдэг. Бидний хөгжүүлсэн систем үүнийг дэмжих үр дүнг авдаг. Энэ шалгалтын тодорхойлолт 0.7472 гарна. Бид 5-р багтаж ирсэн.', 'no': 'Vi bruker Glove først for å lære dei distribuerte representasjonane automatisk frå instansen, spørsmål og svartrekantane. Så vert eit oppmerksbasert bikdirektionalt LSTM- modell (BiLSTM) brukt for å koda trekantane. Vi utfører også ein enkel ensemble metode for å forbetra effektiviteten av modellen vår. Systemet vi utvikla får ein encouraging resultat på denne oppgåva. Det oppnår nøyaktigheten 0,7472 på testsettet. Vi rankerer femte etter den offisielle rekninga.', 'pl': 'Najpierw używamy GloVe, aby automatycznie uczyć się rozproszonych reprezentacji z potrójnych instancji, pytań i odpowiedzi. Następnie do kodowania trójkątów używany jest model dwukierunkowy LSTM (BiLSTM). Wykonujemy również prostą metodę zespołu, aby poprawić efektywność naszego modelu. Opracowany przez nas system osiąga zachęcający rezultat w tym zadaniu. Osiąga dokładność 0.7472 na zestawie testowym. Zgodnie z oficjalnym rankingiem zajmujemy piąte miejsce.', 'sr': 'Prvo koristimo Glove da naučimo raspodjeljene predstave automatski od primjerice, pitanja i odgovora trostruko. Onda se koristi model LSTM (BiLSTM) na osnovu pažnje za kodiranje tri puta. Takoðe izvršavamo jednostavnu metodu da poboljšamo efikasnost našeg model a. Sistem koji smo razvili dobija ohrabrujući rezultat ovog zadatka. Postaje tačnost 0,7472 na testu. Počinjemo 5. po zvaničnom redovištvu.', 'ro': 'În primul rând folosim GloVe pentru a învăța automat reprezentările distribuite din instanța, întrebarea și răspunsul triplu. Apoi, un model bidirecțional LSTM (BiLSTM) bazat pe atenție este folosit pentru a codifica triplele. De asemenea, efectuăm o metodă simplă de ansamblu pentru a îmbunătăți eficiența modelului nostru. Sistemul pe care l-am dezvoltat obține un rezultat încurajator în această sarcină. Acesta atinge acuratețea de 0,7472 pe setul de testare. Suntem pe locul 5 conform clasamentului oficial.', 'si': 'අපි මුලින්ම Glove භාවිතා කරනවා ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නය, ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ උත්තර තුනක් වලින් ස ඊට පස්සේ අවධානය අධිකාරයෙන් දෙපාරික්ෂිත LSTM (BiLSTM) මොඩේල් එකක් ත්\u200dරිපාරක් කෝඩ් කරන්න භාවිත කරය අපි සමහරවිට අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ කරනවා. අපි විශ්වාස කරපු පද්ධතියට මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා. ඒක පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් එකේ හරියට 0.7472 වෙනවා. අපි පතවෙනි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ.', 'so': "Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu u isticmaalnaa GloVe si aan ugu barno noocyada kala qaybsan, tusaale ahaan su'aalaha, su'aalka iyo jawaabta saddexda nooc. Then an attentionbased Bidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) model is used to encode the triples.  Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa qaab fudud oo u sahlan si aan u kordhino awoodda modeleena. nidaamka aan horumarinay wuxuu helaa resultin dhiirrigeliya shaqadan. Waxay gaadhaa saxda 0.7472 oo ku qoran imtixaanka. Shahaadada shanaad sida ay tahay heerka rasmiga ah.", 'ta': 'நாம் முதலில் கிலோவியை பயன்படுத்தி பங்கிடப்பட்ட பிரதிநிதிகளை தானாகவே கற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம் நிகழ்வு, கேள்வி மற்று பின்னர் மூன்று முறைகளை குறியீடாக்க ஒரு கவனம் அடிப்படையில் இருதிசை LSTM (பில்STM) மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. எங்கள் மாதிரியின் விளைவை மேம்படுத்த ஒரு எளிய முறையை நாம் செயல்படுத்துகிறோம். The system we developed obtains an encouraging result on this task.  இது சோதனை அமைப்பில் சரியான 0. 7472 பெறுகிறது. நாங்கள் அதிகாரியமான வரிசைப்படி 5வது தரம்.', 'sv': 'Vi använder först GloVe för att lära oss de distribuerade representationerna automatiskt från instans, fråga och svar trippel. Sedan används en uppmärksamhetsbaserad dubbelriktad LSTM (BiLSTM) modell för att koda trippelen. Vi utför också en enkel ensemblemetod för att förbättra effektiviteten av vår modell. Det system vi utvecklat ger ett uppmuntrande resultat på denna uppgift. Den uppnår noggrannheten 0,7472 på testset. Vi rankas 5:e enligt den officiella rankningen.', 'ur': 'ہم پہلی بار گلووی کا استعمال کریں کہ تقسیم ہوئے نمونات کو اپنا سامان، سوال اور تین جواب سے سیکھیں۔ پھر ایک توجه کی بنیادی دو دقیق LSTM (BiLSTM) موڈل تین سی کوڈ کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. ہم نے بھی ایک سادھی مضبوط طریقہ انجام دیتے ہیں کہ ہمارے مدل کے مطابق اضافہ کریں۔ ہم نے ایجاد کی سیسٹم اس کام پر ایک تحقیق نتیجہ حاصل کرتا ہے۔ یہ تست سٹ پر 0.7472 دقیق پہنچتی ہے۔ ہم پانچویں صف کے مطابق پانچویں صف کرتے ہیں', 'uz': "Biz avtomatik tarqatish tashkilotlarni o'rganish uchun GloVedan foydalanamiz, masalan, savol va javob-javob qilish uchun. Comment Biz modelmizning effektligini oshirish uchun oddiy misol usulini bajaramiz. The system we developed obtains an encouraging result on this task.  Bu sinash tugmasini 0.7472 tugatadi. Биз ҳукумат даражага ўхшаш 5 марта даража.", 'vi': 'Đầu tiên, chúng tôi dùng GloVe để học các bộ trình diễn được phân phối tự động từ trường hợp, câu hỏi và câu trả lời gấp ba. Sau đó một mô hình giao tiếp hai hướng (BiLSTM) được dùng để mã hóa các tế bào. Chúng tôi cũng làm một phương pháp kết hợp đơn giản để nâng tầm hiệu quả của mô hình. Hệ thống chúng tôi phát triển đạt được kết quả tích cực trong nhiệm vụ này. Nó đạt độ chính xác 0.7772 trên bộ thử nghiệm. Chúng tôi đứng thứ năm theo cấp bậc chính thức.', 'hr': 'Prvo koristimo Glove da naučimo raspodjeljene predstave automatski iz primjerice, pitanja i odgovora trostruko. Onda se koristi model LSTM (BiLSTM) na osnovu pozornosti za kodiranje trostruka. Također izvršavamo jednostavnu metodu ensemble kako bi poboljšali učinkovitost našeg model a. Sistem koji smo razvili dobiva ohrabrujući rezultat ovog zadatka. Postoji točnost 0,7472 na testu. Počinjemo 5. po službenom redovanju.', 'nl': 'Eerst gebruiken we GloVe om de gedistribueerde representaties automatisch te leren van de instance-, vraag- en antwoordtriples. Vervolgens wordt een attentiegebaseerd Bidirectioneel LSTM (BiLSTM) model gebruikt om de triples te coderen. We voeren ook een eenvoudige ensemblemethode uit om de effectiviteit van ons model te verbeteren. Het door ons ontwikkelde systeem levert op deze taak een bemoedigend resultaat op. Het bereikt de nauwkeurigheid 0.7472 op de testset. We rangschikken 5e volgens de officiële rangschikking.', 'bg': 'Първо използваме за да научим разпределените представи автоматично от инстанцията, въпросите и отговорите тройки. След това се използва двупосочен модел на вниманието за кодиране на тройките. Ние също така изпълняваме прост ансамбъл метод, за да подобрим ефективността на нашия модел. Системата, която разработихме, постига окуражаващ резултат по тази задача. Той постига точността 0,7472 на тестовия комплект. Ние сме пети според официалната класация.', 'da': 'Vi bruger først GloVe til at lære de distribuerede repræsentationer automatisk fra instans, spørgsmål og svar tredobler. Derefter bruges en opmærksomhedsbaseret Bidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) model til at kode tredoblerne. Vi udfører også en simpel ensemble metode for at forbedre effektiviteten af vores model. Det system, vi har udviklet, opnår et opmuntrende resultat på denne opgave. Det opnår nøjagtigheden 0,7472 på testsættet. Vi rangerer 5. i henhold til den officielle rangering.', 'de': 'Zunächst verwenden wir GloVe, um die verteilten Darstellungen automatisch aus den Instanz-, Frage- und Antwortdreifachen zu lernen. Dann wird ein aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes Bidirektionales LSTM (BiLSTM) Modell verwendet, um die Triple zu codieren. Wir führen auch eine einfache Ensemblemethode durch, um die Effektivität unseres Modells zu verbessern. Das von uns entwickelte System erzielt bei dieser Aufgabe ein ermutigendes Ergebnis. Es erreicht die Genauigkeit 0.7472 auf dem Prüfsatz. Wir belegen den fünften Platz entsprechend der offiziellen Rangliste.', 'ko': '우리는 먼저 장갑을 사용하여 실례, 문제와 답안 삼원조에서 분포식 표시를 자동으로 학습한다.그런 다음 주의 기반 양방향 LSTM(BilSTM) 모델을 사용하여 삼원조를 인코딩합니다.우리는 또 간단한 집적 방법을 채택하여 모델의 유효성을 높였다.우리가 개발한 시스템은 이 임무에서 고무적인 결과를 얻었다.시험집에서 0.7472의 정밀도에 이르렀다.공식 랭킹에 따르면 우리는 5위에 랭크되어 있다.', 'fa': 'اول از Glove برای یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای تقسیم به طور خودکار از مثال، سوال و جواب سه نفر استفاده می\u200cکنیم. سپس یک مدل LSTM (BiLSTM) بر پایه توجه برای رمزبندی سه\u200cگانه استفاده می\u200cشود. ما همچنین یک روش ساده\u200cای را انجام می\u200cدهیم تا موثیت مدل ما را بهبود دهیم. سیستم که توسعه کردیم یک نتیجه رفع\u200cدهنده در این کار می\u200cیابد. این دقیق 0.7472 را در مجموعه آزمایش می رساند. ما طبق صفحه رسمي 5 درجه داريم', 'id': 'Kami pertama-tama menggunakan GloVe untuk mempelajari representation yang disebarkan secara otomatis dari contoh, pertanyaan dan jawaban tiga kali. Kemudian model LSTM (BiLSTM) berdasarkan perhatian digunakan untuk mengkode tiga. Kita juga melakukan metode ensemble sederhana untuk meningkatkan efektivitas model kita. Sistem yang kami kembangkan mendapatkan hasil yang mendorong dalam tugas ini. Ini mencapai akurasi 0,7472 pada set tes. We rank 5th according to the official ranking.', 'sw': 'Kwanza tunatumia GloVe ili kujifunza uwakilishi waliosambazwa kwa uhuru kutoka kwa mfano, swali na majibu matatu. Kisha modeli ya LSTM (BiLSTM) yenye msimamo wa ufuatiliaji unatumiwa kuweka kumbukumbu hizo tatu. Pia tunafanya mbinu rahisi ya kuboresha ufanisi wa mifano yetu. Mfumo tuliotengeneza unapata matokeo ya kuhamasisha katika kazi hii. Inafanikiwa sahihi 0.7472 kwenye seti ya jaribio. Tunajua vyeo vya tano kwa mujibu wa vyeo rasmi.', 'tr': "Öncelikle Glove'yi örnekten, sorgulardan ve üç katdan dağıtılan ifadeleri öğrenmek için kullanırız. Sonra gözlerde iki görnöş şekli LSTM (BiLSTM) nusgasy üçin kodlemek üçin ullanylar. Biz hem modelimiziň etkinliýeti gowurak üçin basit taýýarlama yöntemi ýerine ýetirýäris. Biziň gelişmedik sistemimiz bu zadyň üstünde örän täsirli netijesi aldy. Synagyň düzgüni 0.7472 tapylýar. Resmi sahypa görä 5-nji dereje diýip atlandyrýarys.", 'af': "Ons gebruik eerste Glove om die verdeelde voorstellings outomaties te leer van die voorbeeld, vraag en antwoord tripels. Dan is 'n aandag gebaseerde Bidireksionale LSTM (BiLSTM) model gebruik om die drieples te kodeer. Ons doen ook 'n eenvoudige ensemble metode om die effektiviteit van ons model te verbeter. Die stelsel wat ons ontwikkeld het, kry 'n encouraging resultaat op hierdie taak. Dit bereik die presisie 0.7472 op die toets stel. Ons rank 5de volgens die offisiele ranging.", 'am': 'በመጀመሪያ የGloVe የተለያዩትን መልዕክቶች አውቶማዊ ምሳሌ፣ ጥያቄ እና መልስ ሦስት ፍላጎች ለመማር እንጠይቃለን፡፡ በኋላም የBidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) ሞዴል በሦስት ተሳካቾች ላይ ይጠቀማል፡፡ እና የሞዴልናችንን ጥቅም ለማድረግ ቀላል ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የግንኙነታችንን ስርዓት የዚህን ስራ መጽናናት ፍሬ ያገኛል፡፡ በፈተናው ውስጥ እርግጠቱን 0.7472 ያገኛል፡፡ እንደ ባለሥልጣኑ ደረጃዎች 5ኛ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Së pari përdorim GloVe për të mësuar përfaqësimet e shpërndara automatikisht nga rasti, pyetja dhe përgjigja tre herë. Pastaj përdoret një model LSTM (BiLSTM) me bazë në vëmendje për të koduar tre. Ne kryejmë gjithashtu një metodë të thjeshtë për të përmirësuar efektshmërinë e modelit tonë. The system we developed obtains an encouraging result on this task.  Ai arrin saktësinë 0.7472 në grupin e testit. Ne renditetim i pesti sipas renditjes zyrtare.', 'hy': 'Առաջին հերթին մենք օգտագործում ենք Global-ը, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար սովորենք բաշխված ներկայացումները օրինակից, հարցերից և պատասխաններից երեք անգամ: Հետո ուշադրության վրա հիմնված երկաուղղային LSMT (ԲիԼՍՏՄ) մոդելը օգտագործվում է երեք անգամ կոդավորելու համար: Մենք նաև կատարում ենք մի պարզ համակարգչային մեթոդ, որպեսզի բարելավենք մեր մոդելի արդյունավետությունը: Մեր զարգացած համակարգը հետաքրքիր արդյունք է ստանում այս խնդրի վրա: Այն ստանում է 0.7472 ճշգրտությունը փորձարկումների համակարգում: Մենք հինգերորդ դասակարգվում ենք ըստ պաշտոնական դասակարգման:', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রথমে গ্লোভিকে ব্যবহার করি বিতরণ করা প্রতিনিধিদের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে শিখতে পারি যেমন, প্রশ্ন এবং উত্তর ত্রিবিধি  তারপর একটি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি বাইডেডিয়াল এলস্টিএম (বিএলস্টিএম) মডেল ব্যবহার করা হয় এই ত্রিপগুলো এনকোড করার জন্য। আমরা আমাদের মডেলের কার্যক্রম উন্নত করার জন্য একটি সাধারণ প্রযুক্তি চালাই। যে সিস্টেম আমরা উন্নয়ন করেছি তা এই কাজের জন্য উৎসাহিত ফলাফল পেয়েছে। এটা পরীক্ষা সেটে সঠিকভাবে 0.7472 পৌঁছায়। আনুষ্ঠানিক রেঙ্কিং অনুসারে আমরা ৫ তম রেজি।', 'bs': 'Prvo koristimo Glove da naučimo raspodjeljene predstave automatski iz primjerice, pitanja i odgovora trostruko. Onda se koristi model LSTM (BiLSTM) na osnovu pozornosti za kodiranje trostruka. Također izvršavamo jednostavnu metodu ensemble kako bi poboljšali učinkovitost našeg model a. Sistem koji smo razvili dobiva ohrabrujući rezultat ovog zadatka. Postoji preciznost 0,7472 na testu. Počinjemo 5. po zvaničnom redovanju.', 'ca': "We firstly use GloVe to learn the distributed representations automatically from the instance, question and answer triples.  Llavors s'utilitza un model bidireccional LSTM (BiLSTM) per codificar els triples. We also perform a simple ensemble method to improve the effectiveness of our model.  El sistema que hem desenvolupat obté un resultat encorajador en aquesta tasca. Obtenia la precisió de 0,7472 en el conjunt d'exàmens. Ens classifiquem a la 5ª segons la classificació oficial.", 'az': "Biz ilk dəfə Glove'i özündən dağıtılmış göstəriciləri, soruşmaq və üç dəfə cevap vermək üçün istifadə edirik. Sonra baxımından iki yönəlli LSTM (BiLSTM) modeli üçlüyü kodlamaq üçün kullanılır. Biz də modelimizin etkinliğini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün basit bir ensemble metodumu edərik. Bizim təhsil etdiyimiz sistem bu işdə təsirli bir nəticə alır. Bu test setində 0.7472 ədaləti başa düşər. Biz resmi dərəcələrə görə beşinci dərəcə veririk.", 'cs': 'Nejprve používáme GloVe k automatickému učení distribuovaných reprezentací z trojnásobných instancí, otázek a odpovědí. Následně je k kódování trojic použit pozornost založený na dvousměrném LSTM (BiLSTM). Dále provádíme jednoduchou souborovou metodu pro zlepšení efektivity našeho modelu. Systém, který jsme vyvinuli, dosahuje při tomto úkolu povzbudivého výsledku. Dosahuje přesnosti 0.7472 na zkušební sadě. Máme páté místo podle oficiálního žebříčku.', 'et': "Kõigepealt kasutame GloVe't, et õppida jaotatud esitusi automaatselt juhtumi, küsimuse ja vastuse kolmekordselt. Seejärel kasutatakse kolmekordsete kodeerimiseks tähelepanupõhist kahesuunalist LSTM (BiLSTM) mudelit. Samuti teostame lihtsat ansambli meetodit, et parandada oma mudeli efektiivsust. Meie väljatöötatud süsteem annab selles ülesandes julgustava tulemuse. See saavutab katsekomplektis täpsuse 0,7472. Me oleme ametliku edetabeli järgi 5. kohal.", 'fi': 'Käytämme GloVeä ensinnäkin oppiaksemme hajautetut esitykset automaattisesti tapaus-, kysymys- ja vastauskolminkertaisista. Tämän jälkeen kolminkertaisten koodaamiseen käytetään huomiopohjaista kaksisuuntaista LSTM-mallia (BiLSTM). Toteutamme myös yksinkertaisen ensemble-menetelmän parantaaksemme mallimme tehokkuutta. Kehittämämme järjestelmä saa aikaan rohkaisevan tuloksen tässä tehtävässä. Se saavuttaa tarkkuuden 0,7472 testisarjassa. Sijoitamme viidenneksi virallisen sijoituksen mukaan.', 'sk': 'Najprej uporabljamo GloVe, da se samodejno naučimo porazdeljenih predstavitev iz treh primerov, vprašanj in odgovorov. Nato se za kodiranje trojk uporablja dvosmerni model LSTM (BiLSTM), ki temelji na pozornosti. Izvajamo tudi enostavno ansambelno metodo za izboljšanje učinkovitosti našega modela. Sistem, ki smo ga razvili, pri tej nalogi doseže spodbuden rezultat. Doseže natančnost 0,7472 na testnem kompletu. Po uradni lestvici smo na 5. mestu.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 mb챕w챕 챕ntuk Global V kanggo ngerasakno perusahaan mrangkat nang sampek, sapa-suaran챕 lan mbubatuh챕 telas. Format autodetect Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk sistem sing beraksi kanggo luwih operasi ning model sing bisa nguasar iki dadi. Sistem awak dh챕w챕 nggunak챕 ngertuk winih kanggo nggawe barang iki. Rasane kanggo mbanjurak챕 0,4822 neng ujian sisan Awak dh챕w챕 wis tanggal 5, sing paling dh챕w챕 ning acara offisisi.', 'he': 'ראשית, אנו משתמשים בגלוב כדי ללמוד את ההצגות המפוצצות באופן אוטומטי מהדוגמה, שאלות ותשובה משלושת. ואז מודל LSTM ביכיווני (BiLSTM) מבוסס על תשומת לב משתמש בקוד השלישי. אנחנו גם מבצעים שיטת אנסמבל פשוטה כדי לשפר את היעילות של המודל שלנו. The system we developed obtains an encouraging result on this task.  הוא משיג את מדויקת 0.7472 בסט הבדיקות. אנחנו מדרגים ב-5 לפי הדרגה הרשמית.', 'ha': "We firstly use GloVe to learn the distributed representations automatically from the instance, question and answer triples.  Sa'an nan an yi amfani da wata salon da aka bincike Bidiridal LTRM (BiLSM) don a kode wasu misãlai. Kayya, tuna sami wani hanyoyi mai sauƙi dõmin ya kyautata aikin misalinmu. @ action: button Yana sãmu tsarin 0.7472 a kan jarraba. Mãsu ɗaukaka darajõji na shan a cikin matsayin sarauta.", 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱིས། ང་ཚོས་GloVe དེ་ལ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་བགོ་སྟོན་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་དཔེ་བརྗོད་དང་། དྲི་ཚིག དེ་ནས་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་ཀྱང་བའི་གཉིས་གཡོན་སྡུད་ཀྱི་LSTM (BiLSTM)མ་དབྱིབས་འདི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཀྱིས་འདྲ་བཤུ་བྱེད ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ལྡན་སྐྱོན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟབས་བདེ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ལོ་རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་པའི་མ་ལག་ནི་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་འཕེལ་རིམ་ཤེས་ཏེ། ཚད་འཛིན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟའི་བདེ་ཐག་ཚད་0.7472་ཡིན་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གྲལ་རིམ་ལ་བསྟུན་ནས་༥་པ་གྲལ་འཛིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11 : Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Entailment', 'ar': 'CSReader في SemEval-2018 المهمة 11: الإجابة على أسئلة الاختيار من متعدد كاستلزام نصي', 'pt': 'CSReader no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 11: Resposta a perguntas de múltipla escolha como implicação textual', 'fr': "CSReader au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 11\xa0: Réponse aux questions à choix multiples en tant qu'implication textuelle", 'es': 'CSReader en Semeval-2018 Tarea 11: Respuesta a preguntas de opción múltiple como implicación textual', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のCSReaderタスク11 ：テキストエンテイメントとしての複数選択問題の回答', 'ru': 'CSReader на SemEval-2018 Задача 11: Ответ на вопрос с множественным выбором как текстовое влечение', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 11 पर CSReader: एकाधिक विकल्प प्रश्न पाठ्य अनिवार्यता के रूप में उत्तर देना', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务11者CSReader:为文本蕴涵多选择题对案', 'ga': 'Léitheoir CSR ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Ceist Ilroghnacha ag Freagairt mar Theagmháil Téacs', 'el': 'Εργασία 11: Απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις πολλαπλών επιλογών ως κειμενική επεξεργασία', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Többválasztási kérdések megválaszolása szöveges kiegészítésként', 'lt': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Entailment', 'it': 'CSReader a SemEval-2018 Task 11: risposta alle domande a scelta multipla come approfondimento testuale', 'kk': 'CSReader at semiEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple choice Question Answer as Text Completion', 'mk': 'CSReader на SemEval-2018 задача 11: Одговор на прашања со повеќе избори како текстуална болест', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ CSReader 11: Multiple Choice Query as Textual Entailment', 'mt': 'CSReader f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 11: Tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet b’għażla multipla bħala problema tat-tessut', 'no': 'CSReader at semiEval-2018 oppgåve 11: Fleire val spørsmål svarar som tekstfullføring', 'mn': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Entailment', 'ms': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Entailment', 'pl': 'CSReader w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 11: Odpowiedź na pytania wielokrotnego wyboru jako napis tekstowy', 'ro': 'CSReader la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 11: Răspunsul la întrebări cu răspunsuri multiple ca îmbunătățire textuală', 'sr': 'CSReader na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: odgovor na više izbornih pitanja kao tekstualno završenje', 'si': 'CSreader at semeval-2018 Job 11: Multi Choice Query Answer as Text End', 'so': 'CSRear at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Question Multiple Choice answering as Textual Entailment', 'sv': 'CSReader på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 11: Multiple Choice Fråga Svara som Textuell Entailment', 'ur': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Entailment', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 11: பல தேர்வு கேள்விக்கு பதில் உரை முகவரி', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'CSReade ở SemEvl-208 Task 11: câu hỏi nhiều khả năng giải quyết dưới dạng kết cấu hình thức.', 'nl': 'CSReader op SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Multiple Choice Question Beantwoorden als tekstuele bewerking', 'da': 'CSReader på SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Flere valg spørgsmål besvarelse som tekst Entailment', 'bg': 'Задача 11: Отговаряне на въпроси с многократен избор като текстово обяснение', 'id': 'CSReader di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Entailment', 'hr': 'CSReader na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: Odgovor na višestruko izborno pitanje kao tekstualno završenje', 'de': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Beantwortung als Textnachricht', 'ko': 'CSReader가 SemEval-18 작업 11: 텍스트에 포함된 여러 선택 문제에 대한 답변', 'tr': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Entailment', 'af': 'CSReader by SemEval- 2018 Opdrag 11: Veelvuldige keuse Vraag Antwoord as Tekstuele Voltooiïng', 'sq': 'CSReader në SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Disease', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'sw': 'CSReading at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Swali Multiple Choice Answering as Text Entailment', 'fa': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple choice Answering as Textual Entailment', 'hy': 'CSread', 'az': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Entailment', 'cs': 'CSReader na SemEval-2018 Úkol 11: Více možností odpovědi na otázky jako textové vylepšení', 'bs': 'CSReader na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: Odgovor na višestruko izborno pitanje kao tekstualno isključenje', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ১১: টেক্সটুয়াল ইমেন্ট হিসেবে বহুগুণিক নির্বাচন প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'et': 'CSReader SemEval-2018 ülesanne 11: mitme valikuvõimalusega küsimustele vastamine tekstilise kirjeldusena', 'ca': 'CSReader a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Responding as Textual Disease', 'fi': 'CSReader SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 11: Useiden valintojen kysymyksiin vastaaminen tekstiviestinä', 'jv': 'CSreader at semiinval-2013 task 11: Multiple Select question Replwering as textual Entanment', 'he': 'CSReader ב SemEval-2018 משימה 11: תשובה לשאלות בהחלטה רבה כמחלה טקסטית', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase', 'sk': 'CSReader na SemEval-2018 naloga 11: odgovor na vprašanja z več izbirami kot besedilno razpravo', 'bo': 'CSReader at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Multiple Choice Question Answering as Textual Entailment'}
{'en': 'In this document we present an end-to-end machine reading comprehension system that solves multiple choice questions with a textual entailment perspective. Since some of the knowledge required is not explicitly mentioned in the text, we try to exploit commonsense knowledge by using pretrained word embeddings during contextual embeddings and by dynamically generating a weighted representation of related script knowledge. In the model two kinds of prediction structure are ensembled, and the final accuracy of our system is 10 percent higher than the naiive baseline.', 'ar': 'نقدم في هذا المستند نظامًا شاملاً لفهم القراءة الآلي يحل أسئلة الاختيار من متعدد بمنظور نصي. نظرًا لأن بعض المعرفة المطلوبة لم يتم ذكرها صراحةً في النص ، فإننا نحاول استغلال المعرفة المنطقية من خلال استخدام زخارف الكلمات المحددة مسبقًا خلال حفلات الزفاف السياقية ومن خلال إنشاء تمثيل مرجح للمعرفة ذات الصلة بالنص بشكل ديناميكي. في النموذج ، تم تجميع نوعين من بنية التنبؤ ، والدقة النهائية لنظامنا أعلى بنسبة 10 بالمائة من خط الأساس naiive.', 'fr': "Dans ce document, nous présentons un système de compréhension de la lecture automatique de bout en bout qui résout des questions à choix multiples dans une perspective textuelle. Étant donné que certaines des connaissances requises ne sont pas explicitement mentionnées dans le texte, nous essayons d'exploiter les connaissances de bon sens en utilisant des intégrations de mots préentraînées pendant les intégrations contextuelles et en générant dynamiquement une représentation pondérée des connaissances de script associées. Dans le modèle, deux types de structures de prédiction sont assemblés, et la précision finale de notre système est supérieure de 10\xa0% à la base de référence naïve.", 'pt': 'Neste documento, apresentamos um sistema de compreensão de leitura de máquina de ponta a ponta que resolve questões de múltipla escolha com uma perspectiva de vinculação textual. Como parte do conhecimento necessário não é explicitamente mencionado no texto, tentamos explorar o conhecimento do senso comum usando incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas durante as incorporações contextuais e gerando dinamicamente uma representação ponderada do conhecimento de script relacionado. No modelo, dois tipos de estrutura de previsão são combinados, e a precisão final do nosso sistema é 10% maior do que a linha de base ingênua.', 'es': 'En este documento presentamos un sistema de comprensión de lectura automática de extremo a extremo que resuelve preguntas de opción múltiple con una perspectiva de implicación textual. Dado que algunos de los conocimientos necesarios no se mencionan explícitamente en el texto, tratamos de explotar el conocimiento de sentido común mediante el uso de incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas durante las incrustaciones contextuales y mediante la generación dinámica de una representación ponderada del conocimiento de script relacionado. En el modelo se combinan dos tipos de estructura de predicción, y la precisión final de nuestro sistema es un 10 por ciento más alta que la línea de base ingenua.', 'ja': 'このドキュメントでは、複数の選択肢の質問をテキストの視点で解決するエンドツーエンドの機械読解システムを紹介します。必要な知識の一部はテキストで明示的に言及されていないため、コンテキスト埋め込み中に事前に訓練された単語の埋め込みを使用し、関連するスクリプト知識の重み付け表現を動的に生成することによって、常識的な知識を利用しようとします。このモデルでは2種類の予測構造が組み合わされています我々のシステムの最終的な精度はナイーブなベースラインよりも10パーセント高くなっています', 'ru': 'В этом документе мы представляем комплексную систему понимания машинного чтения, которая решает вопросы с множественным выбором с текстовой точки зрения. Поскольку некоторые из необходимых знаний прямо не упоминаются в тексте, мы пытаемся использовать знания здравого смысла, используя предварительно обученные вставки слов во время контекстных вложений и динамически генерируя взвешенное представление соответствующих знаний сценария. В модели объединены два вида структуры предсказания, и конечная точность нашей системы на 10% выше наивной базовой линии.', 'zh': '于本文档中,发一端到端机器读解系统,当以文本蕴涵解选择题。 故尝试于上下文嵌上下文之间,以豫练之词,动生相关脚本加权以用常识。 模样之中,两占融合,系统终精,高于天真基线10%。', 'hi': 'इस दस्तावेज़ में हम एक एंड-टू-एंड मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन सिस्टम पेश करते हैं जो एक पाठ्य निहितार्थ परिप्रेक्ष्य के साथ एकाधिक विकल्प प्रश्नों को हल करता है। चूंकि आवश्यक कुछ ज्ञान का पाठ में स्पष्ट रूप से उल्लेख नहीं किया गया है, इसलिए हम प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग के दौरान पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके और गतिशील रूप से संबंधित स्क्रिप्ट ज्ञान का भारित प्रतिनिधित्व उत्पन्न करके कॉमनसेंस ज्ञान का फायदा उठाने की कोशिश करते हैं। मॉडल में दो प्रकार की भविष्यवाणी संरचना को जोड़ा जाता है, और हमारे सिस्टम की अंतिम सटीकता नाइव बेसलाइन की तुलना में 10 प्रतिशत अधिक है।', 'ga': 'Sa doiciméad seo cuirimid i láthair córas ríomhthuiscint meaisín ó cheann go ceann a réitíonn ceisteanna ilroghnacha le peirspictíocht téacsúil. Ós rud é nach bhfuil cuid den eolas atá ag teastáil luaite go sainráite sa téacs, déanaimid iarracht leas a bhaint as eolas ciallmhar trí úsáid a bhaint as leabú focal réamhoilte le linn leabaithe comhthéacsúla agus trí léiriú ualaithe ar eolas scripte gaolmhar a ghiniúint go dinimiciúil. Sa mhúnla tá dhá chineál struchtúr tuartha ensemble, agus tá cruinneas deiridh ár gcóras 10 faoin gcéad níos airde ná an bunlíne naiive.', 'el': 'Σε αυτό το έγγραφο παρουσιάζουμε ένα ολοκληρωμένο σύστημα κατανόησης της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης που επιλύει ερωτήματα πολλαπλής επιλογής με μια προοπτική κειμένου. Δεδομένου ότι ορισμένες από τις απαιτούμενες γνώσεις δεν αναφέρονται ρητά στο κείμενο, προσπαθούμε να εκμεταλλευτούμε τη γνώση κοινής λογικής χρησιμοποιώντας προκαθορισμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων κατά τη διάρκεια των περιεχομένων ενσωματώσεων και δημιουργώντας δυναμικά μια σταθμισμένη αναπαράσταση σχετικών γνώσεων σεναρίων. Στο μοντέλο συνδυάζονται δύο είδη δομής πρόβλεψης, και η τελική ακρίβεια του συστήματός μας είναι 10 τοις εκατό υψηλότερη από την αφελή γραμμή βάσης.', 'hu': 'Jelen dokumentumban bemutatunk egy end-to-end gépi olvasásértő rendszert, amely többválasztási kérdéseket szöveges vonatkozási perspektívával old meg. Mivel a szövegben nincs kifejezetten említve a szükséges ismeretek egy részét, igyekszünk kihasználni a közértelmű ismereteket a kontextuális beágyazások során előkészített szóbeágyazások használatával és dinamikusan generálni a kapcsolódó szkriptismeretek súlyozott ábrázolását. A modellben kétféle predikciós struktúra van összeállítva, és rendszerünk végső pontossága 10 százalékkal magasabb, mint a naiív alap.', 'it': "In questo documento presentiamo un sistema end-to-end di comprensione della lettura automatica che risolve domande a risposta multipla con una prospettiva di implicazione testuale. Poiché alcune delle conoscenze richieste non sono esplicitamente menzionate nel testo, cerchiamo di sfruttare la conoscenza del senso comune utilizzando incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate durante incorporazioni contestuali e generando dinamicamente una rappresentazione ponderata delle conoscenze relative agli script. Nel modello sono raggruppati due tipi di struttura predittiva, e l'accuratezza finale del nostro sistema è del 10% superiore alla base naive.", 'kk': 'Бұл құжатта біз бірнеше таңдау сұрақтарын мәтіндік сұрақтарымен шешу машинаның соңындағы оқу жүйесін таңдаймыз. Кейбір мәтінде қажетті білімдердің көбірек мәліметіне сәйкес айтылмаған сияқты, біз көбірек мәліметтерді көбірек мәліметтерді қолдануды және динамикалық түрлі скрипттің білімдерін құру арқылы әдеттегі Екі түрлі таңдау құрылымында қолданылады, жүйеміздің соңғы дұрыстығы найтивті негізгі сызықтың 10 пайызынан артық.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ მაქსინის კითხვის სისტემა, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული არჩევანი კითხვების გარეშე ტექსტულური გარეშე პერვიკუმენტით. იმიტომ, რომ მოჭირდებული კონტექსტური ცნობილებები არ განსხვავებულია ტექსტში, ჩვენ ვცდილობთ გამოვიყენოთ საშუალო ცნობილების გამოყენებული სიტყვები, რომელსაც კონტექსტური შეგრძნობების განსხვავება მოდელში ორი პროგრამეტური წარმოდგენების სტრუქტურაციაში იქნება, და ჩვენი სისტემის ბოლო წარმოდგენება 10 პროცენტის უფრო მეტია, ვიდრე ნაიგური ფესტურ', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatoma nuo galo iki galo mašinos skaitymo supratimo sistema, kuri išspręsia kelis pasirinkimo klausimus tekstiniu požiūriu. Kadangi kai kurios reikalingos žinios tekste aiškiai nenurodytos, bandome išnaudoti bendrąsias žinias naudojant išankstinio mokymo žodžių įtraukimą konteksto įtraukimo metu ir dinamiškai sukuriant svertinį susijusių scenarijų žinių atspindimą. Modelyje susideda dviejų tipų prognozės struktūra, o galutinis mūsų sistemos tikslumas yra 10 proc. didesnis už neigiamą pradinę vertę.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ претставуваме систем на разбирање на читање од крај до крај на машина кој решава прашања за повеќе избори со текстуална перспектива на вмешање. Бидејќи некои од потребните знаења не се експлицитно споменуваат во текстот, ние се обидуваме да искористиме заедничко знаење со користење предобучени зборови вградени за време на контекстуалните вградувања и со динамично генерирање на тежирано претставување на поврзаното знаење на сценариото. Во моделот се составени два вида предвидувачки структури, а конечната точност на нашиот систем е 10% повисока од наивната основа.', 'ms': 'Dalam dokumen ini kami memperkenalkan sistem pemahaman pembacaan mesin akhir-akhir yang memecahkan soalan pilihan berbilang dengan perspektif penyelesaian teks. Oleh kerana sebahagian dari pengetahuan yang diperlukan tidak disebut secara jelas dalam teks, kita cuba untuk mengeksploitasi pengetahuan yang sama dengan menggunakan penyembelihan perkataan yang dilatih sebelum dilatih semasa penyembelihan kontekstual dan dengan menghasilkan secara dinamik perwakilan berat pengetahuan skrip berkaitan. Dalam model, dua jenis struktur ramalan dikumpulkan, dan keperluan akhir sistem kita adalah 10 peratus lebih tinggi daripada asas naif.', 'ml': 'ഈ രേഖയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു അവസാനത്തേക്ക് അവസാനിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രം വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു ടെക്സ് പദാവലിയില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ അറിവ് ആവശ്യമുള്ള ചിലത് പ്രസ്താവികമായി പ്രസ്താവിക്കാതിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തുകടക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പര മോഡലില്\u200d രണ്ടു തരം പ്രവചനങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ അവസാന കൃത', 'mt': 'In this document we present an end-to-end machine reading comprehension system that solves multiple choice questions with a textual entailment perspective.  Peress li xi wħud mill-għarfien meħtieġ mhuwiex imsemmi espliċitament fit-test, a ħna nippruvaw nisfruttaw għarfien komuni billi nużaw inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem imħarrġa minn qabel matul inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwali u billi niġġeneraw b’mod dinamiku rappreżentazzjoni peżata ta’ għarfien relatat tal-iskripti. Fil-mudell jinġabru żewġ tipi ta’ struttura ta’ tbassir, u l-preċiżjoni finali tas-sistema tagħna hija 10 fil-mija ogħla mil-linja bażi naiva.', 'mn': 'Энэ баримтын дотор бид машины унших боломжтой ойлголтын системийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь олон сонголтын асуултуудыг текстур сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй шийддэг. Яагаад гэвэл хэрэгтэй зарим мэдлэгийг текст дээр тодорхой хэлж чадахгүй учраас бид ихэвчлэн мэдлэгийг ашиглаж, мөн нөхцөл байдлын үеийн нэвтрүүлэлтийг ашиглаж, харилцааны мэдлэгийг үнэтэй хэлбэрээр бий болгодог. Хоёр төрлийн таамаглалтын бүтэц загвар дээр тодорхойлдог. Бидний системийн эцсийн тодорхойлолт нь бага суурь шугамнаас 10 хувь өндөр.', 'no': 'I dette dokumentet viser vi ei komprenssystem for lesing av maskinen som løyser fleire val spørsmål med ein tekst- innhaldsperspektiv. Sidan nokre av kunnskapene som krevst er ikkje eksplisisert i teksten, prøver vi å bruka vanleg kunnskap ved å bruka følgjande ordinnbygging under kontekstinnbygging og ved å generera dynamisk ein vekt representasjon av relaterte skriptkunnskap. I modellen er to typar forebyggingsstrukturen sett inn, og den siste nøyaktigheten av systemet vår er 10 prosent høgare enn den naive baseline.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym dokumencie przedstawiamy kompleksowy system rozumienia odczytu maszynowego, który rozwiązuje pytania wielokrotnego wyboru z perspektywą tekstowej implikacji. Ponieważ część wymaganej wiedzy nie jest wyraźnie wymieniona w tekście, staramy się wykorzystać wiedzę zdrowego rozsądku poprzez wykorzystanie wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń słów podczas osadzeń kontekstowych oraz poprzez dynamiczne generowanie ważonej reprezentacji powiązanej wiedzy skryptowej. W modelu zestawione są dwa rodzaje struktury predykcyjnej, a ostateczna dokładność naszego systemu jest 10 procent wyższa niż naiwna baza podstawowa.', 'ro': 'În acest document prezentăm un sistem end-to-end de înțelegere automată a citirii care rezolvă întrebări cu răspuns multiplu cu o perspectivă de implicare textuală. Deoarece unele dintre cunoștințele necesare nu sunt menționate în mod explicit în text, încercăm să exploatăm cunoștințele de bun sens prin utilizarea încorporărilor de cuvinte pre-instruite în timpul încorporărilor contextuale și prin generarea dinamică a unei reprezentări ponderate a cunoștințelor legate de script. În model sunt ansamblate două tipuri de structură de predicție, iar acuratețea finală a sistemului nostru este cu 10% mai mare decât baza naivă.', 'sr': 'U ovom dokumentu predstavljamo sistem razumijevanja mašine za čitanje kraja do kraja koji rešava više pitanja izbora sa tekstualnom perspektivom. Pošto neki od potrebnih znanja nisu jasno spominjani u tekstu, pokušavamo iskoristiti znanje zajedničkog smisla koristeći pretkinuto rečeno ugrađenje tokom kontekstualnih ugrađenja i dinamički stvoriti težinu predstavljanja povezanih znanja skripta. U modelu su obezbeđene dve vrste predviđenja strukture, a konačna tačnost našeg sistema je 10% veća od naivne početne linije.', 'si': 'මේ විස්තාරයේ අපි අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් පද්ධතිය කියවන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා ව සමහර දැනගන්න අවශ්\u200dය දැනගන්නේ කිසිම දේවල් ලිපිනයෙන් ප්\u200dරකාශයෙන් කියන්නේ නැහැ, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය දේවල් භාවිත කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිරේෂණ වචන ස මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දෙකක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, අපේ පද්ධතියේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 10% විතරයි.', 'so': 'In this document we present an end-to-end machine reading comprehension system that solves multiple choice questions with a textual entailment perspective.  Sida darteed aqoonta qaarkood looma baahan karo si cad looga sii sheego qoraalka, waxaynu isku daynaa inaannu isticmaalno aqoonta aqoonta shirkadda ee lagu soo daabaco xilliga guud iyo si dabiicadeed ah u sameynaa muuqashada aqoonta qorniinka ee la xiriira. Tusaalada waxaa ku qoran laba nooc oo ka mid ah wax la sii sheego, habaarka ugu dambeeyana waa 10 boqolkiiba oo ka sarreeya qoriga hoose.', 'ta': 'இந்த ஆவணத்தில் நாம் முடிவு முடிவில் உள்ள இயந்திரத்தை படிக்கும் தொகுதி அமைப்பை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். அது பல தேர்வுகளை தீர்வ சில அறிவு தேவைப்பட்டதால் உரையில் வெளிப்படையாக குறிப்பிடப்படவில்லை என்பதால், நாம் முயற்சிக்கிறோம் பொதுவான வார்த்தையை பயன்படுத்தி தற்காலிக நிலையான மாதிரியில் இரண்டு வகையான முன்வாக்கி அமைப்புகள் ஒப்பிடுகின்றன, நம் கணினியின் கடைசி சரிவு 10% அதிகமாக இருக்கும் நையூட்ட', 'sv': 'I detta dokument presenterar vi ett end-to-end maskinläsförståelse system som löser flervalsfrågor med ett textperspektiv. Eftersom en del av den kunskap som krävs inte uttryckligen nämns i texten försöker vi utnyttja allmänska kunskaper genom att använda förkränade ord inbäddningar under kontextuella inbäddningar och genom att dynamiskt generera en vägd representation av relaterad scriptkunskap. I modellen är två typer av förutsägelsestruktur sammansatta, och den slutliga noggrannheten i vårt system är 10 procent högre än den naiva baseline.', 'ur': 'اس دکھانے میں ہم ایک ماشین پڑھنے کی سمجھ سیسٹم کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو ایک ٹیکسٹل کے ساتھ بہت سی انتخاب سوال حل کرتا ہے۔ اس وجہ سے کہ کچھ علم ضروری ہے کہ اس کے متن میں صریح ذکر نہیں کی جاتی ہے، ہم اسے معلوم سمجھنے کی کوشش کریں گے کہ اس کے ذریعہ سے متوجہ ہونے والی کلمات کا استعمال کریں مدل میں دو قسم کی پیش بینی ساختار بندی کی گئی ہے اور ہمارے سیستم کی آخری دقیق 10 فیصد سے زیادہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Ushbu hujjatda biz tugmalar birikmasini o'qish tizimini qo'shish uchun bir nechta tanlangan maslahatlarni matn bilan taʼminlovchi qo'l koʻrinishi bilan aniqlash. Chunki ma'lumot kerak boʻlgan maʼlumot matnday notoʻgʻri emas, biz ma'lumotni faqat bilan foydalanishni harakat qilamiz muvaffaqiyatlar ichiga keladigan so'zlarni ishlatishni istaysizmi va aniqlik bilan bog'liq skriptning taʼlumotini aniqlashni yaratish mumkin. Bu modeldagi ikki xil preqqat tizimning oxirgi tizimimizning oxirgi qiymati nazar asboblaridan 10 foiz yuqori.", 'vi': 'Trong tài liệu này chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống đọc thấu máy tới cuối để giải quyết các câu hỏi lựa chọn nhiều lần với một viễn cảnh kết cấu. Vì một số kiến thức cần thiết không được đề cập trực tiếp trong văn bản, chúng tôi cố gắng khai thác kiến thức thông thường bằng cách sử dụng những từ nhúng vào trước khi tình huống xảy ra và tạo ra các chi tiết quan trọng của kiến thức văn bản liên quan. Trong mô hình hai loại cấu trúc dự đoán được tổng hợp, và độ chính xác cuối cùng của hệ thống là 10 phần trăm cao hơn so với cơ sở viễn cảnh.', 'da': 'I dette dokument præsenterer vi et end-to-end maskinlæseforståelsessystem, der løser flere valgsspørgsmål med et tekstligt involveringsperspektiv. Da noget af den krævede viden ikke udtrykkeligt er nævnt i teksten, forsøger vi at udnytte almindelig viden ved at bruge forudtrænede ord indlejringer under kontekstuelle indlejringer og ved dynamisk at generere en vægtet repræsentation af relateret scriptviden. I modellen er to slags forudsigelsesstruktur sammensat, og den endelige nøjagtighed af vores system er 10 procent højere end den naive baseline.', 'hr': 'U ovom dokumentu predstavljamo sustav razumijevanja uređaja za čitanje kraja do kraja koji rješava više pitanja izbora s tekstualnom perspektivom za uključenje. Pošto neki od potrebnih znanja nisu jasno spominjani u tekstu, pokušavamo iskoristiti znanje zajedničkog smisla koristeći pretkišene riječi ugrađenje tijekom kontekstnih ugrađenja i dinamički stvoriti težinu predstavljanja povezanih znanja skripta. U modelu su obezbjeđene dvije vrste predviđanja, a konačna preciznost našeg sustava je 10% viša od naivnog početnog linije.', 'nl': 'In dit document presenteren we een end-to-end machine reading begrijpingssysteem dat multiple choice vragen oplost met een tekstueel implicatieperspectief. Omdat een deel van de vereiste kennis niet expliciet wordt vermeld in de tekst, proberen we gezonde kennis te benutten door vooraf getrainde woord embeddings te gebruiken tijdens contextuele embeddings en door dynamisch een gewogen weergave van gerelateerde scriptkennis te genereren. In het model worden twee soorten voorspellingsstructuur samengevoegd, en de uiteindelijke nauwkeurigheid van ons systeem is 10 procent hoger dan de naïeve baseline.', 'bg': 'В този документ представяме система за машинно четене от край до край, която решава въпроси с многократен избор с текстова перспектива. Тъй като част от изискваните знания не са изрично споменати в текста, ние се опитваме да използваме общоприетото знание чрез използване на предварително тренирани словесни вграждания по време на контекстуални вграждания и чрез динамично генериране на претеглено представяне на свързаните със скриптовите знания. В модела са ансамблирани два вида прогнозна структура, а крайната точност на нашата система е с 10% по-висока от наивната базова линия.', 'id': 'Dalam dokumen ini kami mempersembahkan sistem pemahaman pembacaan mesin akhir-akhir yang memecahkan banyak pertanyaan pilihan dengan perspektif keterlibatan tekstual. Karena beberapa pengetahuan yang diperlukan tidak secara eksplisit disebutkan dalam teks, kami mencoba untuk mengeksploitasi pengetahuan umum dengan menggunakan penerbangan kata yang dilatih sebelum dilatih selama penerbangan kontekstual dan dengan secara dinamik menghasilkan represisi berat pengetahuan skrip berkaitan. Dalam model dua jenis struktur prediksi disempurnakan, dan akurasi akhir sistem kita 10 persen lebih tinggi dari dasar dasar naif.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 처음부터 끝까지 기계 읽기와 이해 시스템을 소개했는데 이 시스템은 텍스트에 포함된 측면에서 여러 가지 선택 문제를 해결한다.텍스트에 필요한 지식이 명확하게 언급되지 않았기 때문에 우리는 상식지식을 이용하여 상하문 삽입 과정에서 미리 훈련된 단어를 삽입하고 관련 스크립트 지식의 가중 표시를 동태적으로 생성하고자 한다.이 모델은 두 가지 예측 구조를 융합시켜 시스템의 최종 정밀도가 NAIVE 기선보다 10% 높다.', 'de': 'In diesem Dokument stellen wir ein durchgängiges maschinelles Leseverständnissystem vor, das Multiple-Choice-Fragen mit einer textuellen Einbeziehungsperspektive löst. Da ein Teil des benötigten Wissens im Text nicht explizit erwähnt wird, versuchen wir, gesundes Wissen zu nutzen, indem wir bei kontextuellen Einbettungen vorgetrainierte Wort-Einbettungen verwenden und dynamisch eine gewichtete Darstellung verwandter Skriptkenntnisse generieren. Im Modell werden zwei Arten von Vorhersagestrukturen zusammengefügt, und die endgültige Genauigkeit unseres Systems ist zehn Prozent höher als die naive Baseline.', 'fa': 'در این سند ما یک سیستم درک\u200cشناسی ماشین آخر و پایان را نشان می\u200cدهیم که سوال\u200cهای چندین انتخاب را با یک نگاه\u200cبندی متن حل می\u200cکند. به خاطر اینکه بعضی از دانش های لازم در متن مشخص نیستند، ما سعی می کنیم دانش معمولی را از طریق استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای مختلف در پیوند\u200cهای متوسط استفاده کنیم و با تولید یک نمایش وزن از دانش نوشته\u200cهای متوسط استفاده کنیم. در مدل دو نوع ساختار پیش بینی مشخص شده و دقیق نهایی سیستم ما 10 درصد بالاتر از خط اصلی است.', 'af': "In hierdie dokument vertoon ons 'n einde-tot-einde masjien lees verstaan stelsel wat verstaan veelvuldige keuse vrae met 'n tekstuurlike aanhouding perspektief oplos. Omdat sommige van die benodigte kennis nie uitsondelik in die teks genoem is nie, probeer ons om gewoonlike kennis te uitbrei deur die gebruik van voorafgewende woord inbettings in contextual inbettings en deur dinamiese genereer van 'n geweegte voorstelling van verwante skrip kennis. In die model is twee soorte voorskou struktuur ingestel, en die eindelike presisie van ons stelsel is 10 persent hoër as die naiiewe basislien.", 'tr': 'Bu senede tekst taýýarlanmasy bilen birnäçe seçgi soraglary çözýän maşynyň ahyry sistemini görkeýäris. Şanslı bilgilerin bazıları metin içinde a çık bir şekilde ifade edilmediğine göre, mantıklı bilgi kullanarak sıkıntılı söz integrleri kullanarak ve dinamik şekilde kaynaklı bir skriptli bilgi oluşturarak kullanmaya çalışıyoruz. Bu nusgada iki nähili tahmin edip duran strukturunda çykylýar, we sistemamyzyň soňky dogrylygymyň 10%-den ýokarydyr.', 'hy': 'Այս փաստաթղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք վերջ-վերջ մեքենայի ընթերցման ընկալումների համակարգ, որը լուծում է բազմաթիվ ընտրական հարցեր տեքստային ներգրավման տեսանկյունից: Քանի որ տեքստում անհրաժեշտ գիտելիքներից որոշները բացահայտորեն չեն նշված, մենք փորձում ենք օգտագործել ընդհանուր գիտելիքը օգտագործելով նախադասական բառերի ներդրումներ կոնտեքստային ներդրումների ընթացքում և դինամիկ կերպով ստեղծելով հարաբերված գրաֆիտի գիտ Մոդելի մեջ կանխատեսման երկու տեսակի կառուցվածքները համադրված են, և մեր համակարգի վերջնական ճշգրտությունը 10 տոկոսով ավելի բարձր է, քան նայիվ հիմքը:', 'am': 'በዚህ ሰነድ ውስጥ የመጨረሻ ወደ መጨረሻ መሠረት ማሻሻሻን እናቀርባለን የጥያቄ ምርጫዎች በተጨማሪው መልዕክት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በጽሑፉ ውስጥ የሚያስፈልገው አንዳንዶቹ እውቀት ግልፅ ሳይታወቅ፣ የአሁኑን ግልጾች ውስጥ የሚደረጉትን ቃላትን በመጠቀም እና በተመለከተው የጽሑፍ እውቀት በሚዛን መልክ በመፍጠር እንሞክራለን፡፡ በሙሉ ሁለት ዓይነት የፍጻሜ አካባቢ እና የስርዓታችን የመጨረሻው ውርደት ከናይብ መሠረት በላይ 10 በመቶ የበለጠ ነው፡፡', 'sw': 'Katika nyaraka hii tunaonyesha mashine ya mwisho ya mwisho kwa kusoma mfumo wa kompyuta unaosababisha maswali mengi ya uchaguzi kwa mtazamo wa maandishi. Kwa kuwa baadhi ya maarifa yanayohitajika hayajatajwa wazi katika maandishi, tunajaribu kutumia maarifa ya umma kwa kutumia maneno yaliyochapishwa wakati wa vipindi vya kisasa na kwa kutengeneza uwakilishi mzito wa maarifa yanayohusiana na uandishi. In the model two kinds of prediction structure are ensembled, and the final accuracy of our system is 10 percent higher than the naiive baseline.', 'az': 'Bu səhifədə bir maşna oxumaq sistemini göstərdik ki, bir çoxlu seçim suallarını textual content perspective ilə çəkir. Həqiqətən, ehtiyacı olan elmdən bəziləri mətndə a çıq-aşkar deyildir, biz müxtəlif mətnlərin sığınacaq sözləri istifadə edərək və dinamik olaraq qoşulan skriptlər bilgisinin çəkilməsini yaratmaq istəyirik. İki növ tədbir quruluşu modellərdə daxil edilir. Sistemimizin son doğruluğu naivi sətirdən 10%-dən yüksəkdir.', 'sq': 'Në këtë dokument ne paraqesim një sistem përfundimtar të leximit të makinave që zgjidh pyetje të shumta zgjedhjesh me një perspektivë tekstuale përfshirje. Meqenëse disa nga njohuritë e kërkuara nuk përmenden në mënyrë eksplicite në tekst, ne përpiqemi të shfrytëzojmë njohuritë e përbashkëta duke përdorur përfshirje fjalësh të paramësuara gjatë përfshirjeve kontekstuale dhe duke gjeneruar dinamikisht një përfaqësim të peshuar të njohuritë e lidhura me script. Në modelin janë mbledhur dy lloje strukture parashikimi dhe saktësia përfundimtare e sistemit tonë është 10 përqind më e lartë se baza naive.', 'bn': 'এই নথিতে আমরা একটি শেষ পর্যন্ত মেশিন পাঠ করি সম্পূর্ণ সিস্টেম যা টেক্সচুয়ালের প্রত্যাখ্যানের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দিয়ে বেশ কিছ যেহেতু প্রয়োজনীয় কিছু জ্ঞানের কিছু স্পষ্টভাবে লেখায় না উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে, আমরা সামাজিক জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করতে চেষ্টা করছি যেহেতু সাধারণ বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ব মডেলে দুটি ধরনের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী কাঠামোর মাধ্যমে বিস্তৃত হয়েছে এবং আমাদের সিস্টেমের চূড়ান্ত সঠিকভাবে ১০ শতাংশ নেইভ ব', 'bs': 'U ovom dokumentu predstavljamo sistem razumijevanja mašine za čitanje kraja do kraja koji rješava više pitanja izbora sa perspektivom tekstualnog zadržavanja. Pošto neki od potrebnih znanja nisu jasno spominjani u tekstu, pokušavamo iskoristiti znanje zajedničkog smisla koristeći pretkinuto rečeno ugrađenje tijekom kontekstnih ugrađenja i dinamički stvoriti težinu predstavljanja povezanih znanja skripta. U modelu su obezbeđene dvije vrste predviđanja, a konačna preciznost našeg sistema je 10% veća od naivne početne linije.', 'ca': "En aquest document presentem un sistema de comprensió de llegir màquines de final a final que resol múltiples preguntes d'elecció amb una perspectiva d'involucració textual. Com que alguns dels coneixements requerits no es mencionen explícitament en el text, intentem explotar el coneixement comú utilitzant incorporacions de paraules pré-entrenades durant incorporacions contextuals i generant dinàmicament una representació ponderada del coneixement relacionat amb l'escriptura. En el model hi ha dos tipus d'estructura de predicció, i la precisió final del nostre sistema és del 10% més alta que la basa naiva.", 'cs': 'V tomto dokumentu představujeme komplexní systém porozumění strojovému čtení, který řeší otázky více výběru s perspektivou textové implikace. Vzhledem k tomu, že část požadovaných znalostí není v textu explicitně zmíněna, snažíme se využít znalosti zdravého rozumu pomocí předtrénovaných vložení slov při kontextových vloženích a dynamickým generováním vážené reprezentace souvisejících znalostí skriptu. V modelu jsou sestaveny dva druhy predikční struktury a konečná přesnost našeho systému je o deset procent vyšší než naivní základní linie.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame lõpuni masinlugemise mõistmise süsteemi, mis lahendab mitme valikuga küsimusi tekstilise kaasamise perspektiivist. Kuna osa vajalikest teadmistest ei ole tekstis selgesõnaliselt mainitud, püüame kasutada üldse mõistlikke teadmisi, kasutades kontekstipõhiste manustamiste ajal eeltreenitud sõnade manustamist ja dünaamiliselt genereerides sellega seotud skriptiteadmiste kaalutud representatsiooni. Mudelis on kombineeritud kahte tüüpi prognooside struktuur ja meie süsteemi lõplik täpsus on 10% kõrgem kui naiivne algväärtus.', 'fi': 'Tässä asiakirjassa esitellään end-to-end konelukujen ymmärtämisjärjestelmä, joka ratkaisee monivalintakysymyksiä tekstillisen osallisuuden näkökulmasta. Koska osa tarvittavasta tiedosta ei ole nimenomaisesti mainittu tekstissä, pyrimme hyödyntämään yleistä järkeä käyttämällä esikoulutettuja sanaupotuksia kontekstuaalisten upotusten aikana ja tuottamalla dynaamisesti painotetun esityksen aiheeseen liittyvästä skriptitiedosta. Mallissa yhdistetään kahdenlaisia ennusterakenteita, ja järjestelmämme lopullinen tarkkuus on 10 prosenttia korkeampi kuin naiivi perusviiva.', 'jv': 'Nang dokumen iki, kita nambah sistem sing basa gambar n\' end-to-end panjenengan kelas kang sampeyan panggayong sing nyimpen bantuan karo nggo langgambar textual. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Genjer-genjer sistem sing dibenakake duwé ngerasah', 'sk': 'V tem dokumentu predstavljamo celovit sistem razumevanja strojnega branja, ki rešuje vprašanja z več izbirami z besedilno perspektivo vključevanja. Ker nekatera zahtevana znanja niso izrecno omenjena v besedilu, poskušamo izkoristiti splošno znanje z uporabo predtreniranih besednih vdelav med kontekstualnimi vdelavami in dinamično ustvarjanjem ponderiranega predstavitve povezanega znanja skripta. V modelu sta sestavljeni dve vrsti napovedne strukture, končna natančnost našega sistema pa je 10 odstotkov višja od naivne osnovne vrednosti.', 'ha': "Daga wannan dokuman, muna halatar da wata mashine ta ƙari-zuwa-ƙari, mai karanta na'ura, wanda ke sola masu tambayar zaɓani masu yawa da wani mtazami na masu sani na littãfi. Daga da wani abu daga ilmi wanda aka buɗa ba zai iya faɗa shi ba, mai bayyani a cikin littãfin, sai muna jarraba mu yi amfani da kunyar komasanci da za'a yi fassara da magana wanda za'a fito da shi a lokacin da ke cikin littãfin da ke cikin bayani. Yana cikin shirin ayuka biyu masu basĩra, kuma tsarin ƙarami na'uranmu yana da asilimi 10 mafiya girma daga layin naiki.", 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོར་ཡིག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆས་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་ལག་གི་ལྟ་ཀློག་ནུས་མ་ལག་ལེན་པའི་གདམ་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ Since some of the knowledge required is not explicitly mentioned in the text, we try to exploit commonsense knowledge by using pretrained word embeddings during contextual embeddings and by dynamically generating a weighted representation of related script knowledge. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་སྔོན་འཆར་གཞུང་གི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ནང་དུ་བཅུག་ཡོད།', 'he': 'In this document we present an end-to-end machine reading comprehension system that solves multiple choice questions with a textual entailment perspective.  מכיוון שחלק מהידע הנדרש לא מוזכר באופן ברור בטקסט, אנו מנסים לנצל ידע משותף על ידי השימוש בתכניות מילים מלפני אימון במהלך תוכניות קונטקסטיות ובדרך דינמית לייצור מייצג משקל של ידע התסריט הקשור. In the model two kinds of prediction structure are ensembled, and the final accuracy of our system is 10 percent higher than the naiive baseline.'}
{'en': 'YNU-HPCC at Semeval-2018 Task 11 : Using an Attention-based CNN-LSTM for Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'ar': 'YNU-HPCC في Semeval-2018 المهمة 11: استخدام CNN-LSTM القائم على الانتباه لفهم الآلة باستخدام معرفة Commonsense', 'fr': "YNU-HPCC à Semeval-2018 Tâche 11\xa0: Utilisation d'un CNN-LSTM basé sur l'attention pour la compréhension des machines à l'aide de Commonsense Knowledge", 'es': 'YNU-HPCC en la Tarea 11 de Semeval-2018: Uso de un CNN-LSTM basado en la atención para la comprensión de máquinas mediante el conocimiento de sentido común', 'pt': 'YNU-HPCC na Semeval-2018 Tarefa 11: Usando um CNN-LSTM baseado em atenção para compreensão de máquina usando o conhecimento do senso comum', 'ja': 'YNU - HPCC at Semeval -2018 Task 11: Using a Attention - based CNN - LSTM for Machine Understanding using Commonsense Knowledge', 'hi': 'Semeval-2018 कार्य 11 पर YNU-HPCC: Commonsense ज्ञान का उपयोग करके मशीन समझ के लिए एक ध्यान-आधारित CNN-LSTM का उपयोग करना', 'zh': 'YNU-HPCC在Semeval-2018务11:用意力者CNN-LSTM用常识机器解', 'ru': 'YNU-HPCC на Semeval-2018 Задача 11: Использование CNN-LSTM на основе внимания для понимания машины с использованием знаний здравого смысла', 'ga': 'YNU-HPCC ag Semeval-2018 Tasc 11: CNN-LSTM atá bunaithe ar Aird a Úsáid le haghaidh Tuiscint Inneall ag baint úsáide as Commonsense Knowledge', 'ka': 'YNU', 'hu': 'YNU-HPCC a Semeval-2018 11. feladat: Figyelem alapú CNN-LSTM használata a gépek megértéséhez a Commonsense Knowledge segítségével', 'it': "YNU-HPCC a Semeval-2018 Task 11: Utilizzo di un CNN-LSTM basato sull'attenzione per la comprensione delle macchine utilizzando conoscenze comuni", 'lt': 'YNU-HPCC pusmečio 2018 m. 11 užduotis: dėmesiu pagrįsto CNN-LSTM naudojimas mašinų supratimui naudojant bendrąsias žinias', 'el': 'Εργασία 11: Χρήση ενός βασισμένου στην προσοχή για την κατανόηση μηχανών χρησιμοποιώντας τη γνώση κοινής λογικής', 'ml': 'സെമെവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 11-ല്\u200d യുന്\u200dയൂ- ഹിപിസിസി: കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസിന്റെ അറിവ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മെഷീന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു', 'kk': 'YNU', 'mt': 'YNU-HPCC at Semeval-2018 Task 11: Using an Attention-based CNN-LSTM for Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'mn': 'YNU-HPCC at Semeval-2018 Task 11: Attention-based CNN-LSTM for Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'mk': 'YNU-HPCC на полувечната-2018 задача 11: Користење на внимание базиран CNN-LSTM за машинско разбирање со користење на заедничко знаење', 'no': 'YNU-HPCC på halvåld-2018 oppgåve 11: Bruk ein Attention-based CNN-LSTM for Machine Comprehension med Commonsense Knowledge', 'ro': 'YNU-HPCC la Semeval-2018 Sarcina 11: Utilizarea unui CNN-LSTM bazat pe atenție pentru înțelegerea mașinilor utilizând cunoștințele Commonsense', 'ms': 'YNU-HPCC pada Semeval-2018 Task 11: Menggunakan CNN-LSTM berdasarkan perhatian untuk Pemahaman Mesin menggunakan Pengetahuan Komuni', 'sr': 'YNU-HPCC na poluvek-2018 zadatku 11: korištenje pozornosti na CNN-LSTM za komprehenziju mašine korištenje znanja Commonsense', 'si': 'YNA-HPCC at Halfeval-2018 Job 11: Using a Attension-based CNN-LSTM for machine Comprexence Using Comsens KnowKnowKnowKnowKnowKnow', 'sv': 'YNU-HPCC på Semeval-2018 Uppgift 11: Använda en uppmärksamhetsbaserad CNN-LSTM för maskinförståelse med Commonsense Knowledge', 'ta': 'செமெவால்- 2018 செயல் 11- ல் யுனு- ஹ்பிசிசி: பொறியின் அறிவை பயன்படுத்தும் பொறியின் மீட்டெடுப்பிற்கு ஒரு கவனம் அடிப்படையான CNN- LSTM', 'pl': 'YNU-HPCC w Semeval-2018 Zadanie 11: Wykorzystanie CNN-LSTM opartego na uwadze do zrozumienia maszyn z wykorzystaniem wiedzy powszechnej', 'ur': 'YNU-HPCC ٹاکس 11 میں: کمنسنسس علم کے مطابق ماشین کمپرینسی کے لئے مطابق سین-LSTM کا استعمال کرتا ہے', 'so': 'YNU-HPCC at Semeval-2018 Task 11: Using an Attention-based CNN-LSTM for machine Comprehension using Commonsence Knowledge', 'uz': 'Semeval- 2018 vazifa 11- yilda YNU- HPCC: Kommunisasi maʼlumoti yordamida hisoblash uchun Mashine kompyuterdan foydalanish', 'vi': 'Tập tin Ynu-HbCC tại Semeval-thẩm 8 Task 11: Sử dụng kênh kênh CNN-LSTM Chú ý cho Machine Compention with Commonwealth', 'bg': 'Задача 11: Използване на базирана на вниманието система за разбиране на машините с помощта на познания за общото съзнание', 'da': 'YNU-HPCC på Semeval-2018 Opgave 11: Brug af en opmærksomhedsbaseret CNN-LSTM til maskinforståelse ved hjælp af almindelig viden', 'nl': 'YNU-HPCC bij Semeval-2018 Taak 11: Aandacht-based CNN-LSTM gebruiken voor Machine Comprehension met behulp van Commonsense Knowledge', 'hr': 'YNU-HPCC na poluvječnom zadatku 11: korištenje pozornosti na CNN-LSTM za kompresiju strojeva koristeći znanje Commonsense', 'de': 'YNU-HPCC bei Semeval-2018 Aufgabe 11: Verwendung eines aufmerksamkeitsbasierten CNN-LSTM für Maschinenverständnis unter Verwendung von Commonsense Knowledge', 'id': 'YNU-HPCC di Semeval-2018 Task 11: Menggunakan CNN-LSTM berdasarkan perhatian untuk Comprehension Mesin menggunakan Knowledge Commonsense', 'ko': 'YNU-HPCC가 Semeval-2018에서의 퀘스트 11: 주의력 기반의 CNN-LSTM을 사용하여 상식지식을 사용하여 기계적 이해', 'fa': 'YNU', 'sw': 'YNU-HPCC katika kazi ya Semeval-2018 11: Kwa kutumia CNN-LSTM yenye msingi wa hadhira kwa ajili ya kompyuta ya mashine kwa kutumia ujuzi wa umma', 'sq': 'YNU-HPCC në Semeval-2018 Task 11: Using a attention-based CNN-LSTM for Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'tr': 'YNU-HPCC at Semeval-2018 Task 11: Using a Attention-based CNN-LSTM for Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge', 'af': "YNU-HPCC by Semeval-2018 Opdrag 11: Gebruik van 'n aandag-gebaseerde CNN-LSTM vir Masjienkomprehensie gebruik Commonsense kennis", 'am': 'ስራ 11:', 'az': 'YNU', 'hy': 'YNHCC-ը 2018-ի կիսամյակի 11-րդ հանձնարարում. Ուշադրության հիմնված CNN-LStm օգտագործելը մեքենայի ընկալումների համար, օգտագործելով համայնական գիտելիքներ', 'bn': 'সেমেভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১১-এ ইয়ানিউ-এইচপিসিসি: কমানসেন্স জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে মেশিনের জন্য মনোযোগ ভিত্তিক সিএনএন-এলসিএম ব্যবহার করে', 'bs': 'YNU-HPCC na poluvječnom zadatku 11: Koristenje pozornosti na CNN-LSTM za kompresiju mašine koristeći znanje Commonsense', 'ca': "YNU-HPCC al Semeval-2018 Task 11: Utilitzar un CNN-LSTM basat en l'atenció per a la comprensió de màquines utilitzant coneixements comuns", 'cs': 'YNU-HPCC na Semeval-2018 Úkol 11: Použití CNN-LSTM založeného na pozornosti pro porozumění strojů s využitím obecných znalostí', 'et': 'YNU-HPCC Semeval-2018 ülesandel 11: Tähelepanupõhise CNN-LSTM kasutamine masinate mõistmiseks, kasutades üldteadmisi', 'fi': 'YNU-HPCC Semeval-2018 tehtävässä 11: Huomioon perustuvan CNN-LSTM:n käyttäminen koneymmärrykseen yleisen tietoisuuden avulla', 'jv': 'YNU', 'he': 'YNU-HPCC בחצי-2018 משימה 11: להשתמש ב CNN-LSTM מבוסס על תשומת לב עבור בינה מכונות בשימוש ידע משותף', 'ha': 'YNU-HPCC at Semewali- 2018 Tafiyar 11: Using an AttAttitored-based CNN-LstuM for Machine Comprehension by Commonsense', 'sk': 'YNU-HPCC na nalogi 11 Semeval 2018: Uporaba CNN-LSTM na osnovi pozornosti za razumevanje strojev z uporabo splošnega znanja', 'bo': 'YNU-HPCC at Semeval-2018 Task 11: Using an Attention-based CNN-LSTM for Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge'}
{'en': 'This shared task is a typical question answering task. Compared with the normal question and answer system, it needs to give the answer to the question based on the text provided. The essence of the problem is actually reading comprehension. Typically, there are several questions for each text that correspond to it. And for each question, there are two candidate answers (and only one of them is correct). To solve this problem, the usual approach is to use convolutional neural networks (CNN) and recurrent neural network (RNN) or their improved models (such as long short-term memory (LSTM)). In this paper, an attention-based CNN-LSTM model is proposed for this task. By adding an attention mechanism and combining the two models, this experimental result has been significantly improved.', 'ar': 'هذه المهمة المشتركة هي مهمة نموذجية للإجابة على السؤال. بالمقارنة مع نظام الأسئلة والأجوبة العادي ، فإنه يحتاج إلى إعطاء إجابة على السؤال بناءً على النص المقدم. جوهر المشكلة هو في الواقع فهم القراءة. عادة ، هناك عدة أسئلة لكل نص يتوافق معه. ولكل سؤال ، هناك إجابتان مرشحتان (وإجابة واحدة فقط صحيحة). لحل هذه المشكلة ، تتمثل الطريقة المعتادة في استخدام الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية (CNN) والشبكة العصبية المتكررة (RNN) أو نماذجها المحسنة (مثل الذاكرة طويلة المدى (LSTM)). في هذه الورقة ، تم اقتراح نموذج CNN-LSTM قائم على الانتباه لهذه المهمة. من خلال إضافة آلية الانتباه والجمع بين النموذجين ، تم تحسين هذه النتيجة التجريبية بشكل كبير.', 'es': 'Esta tarea compartida es una tarea típica de respuesta a preguntas. En comparación con el sistema normal de preguntas y respuestas, debe dar la respuesta a la pregunta en función del texto proporcionado. La esencia del problema es, en realidad, la comprensión lectora. Por lo general, hay varias preguntas para cada texto que le corresponden. Y para cada pregunta, hay dos respuestas candidatas (y solo una de ellas es correcta). Para resolver este problema, el enfoque habitual es utilizar redes neuronales convolucionales (CNN) y redes neuronales recurrentes (RNN) o sus modelos mejorados (como la memoria a corto plazo a largo plazo (LSTM)). En este artículo, se propone un modelo CNN-LSTM basado en la atención para esta tarea. Al añadir un mecanismo de atención y combinar los dos modelos, este resultado experimental se ha mejorado significativamente.', 'pt': 'Essa tarefa compartilhada é uma tarefa típica de resposta a perguntas. Comparado com o sistema normal de perguntas e respostas, ele precisa dar a resposta à pergunta com base no texto fornecido. A essência do problema é realmente a compreensão da leitura. Normalmente, há várias perguntas para cada texto que correspondem a ele. E para cada pergunta, há duas respostas candidatas (e apenas uma delas está correta). Para resolver esse problema, a abordagem usual é usar redes neurais convolucionais (CNN) e redes neurais recorrentes (RNN) ou seus modelos aprimorados (como memória de longo prazo e curto prazo (LSTM)). Neste artigo, um modelo CNN-LSTM baseado em atenção é proposto para esta tarefa. Ao adicionar um mecanismo de atenção e combinar os dois modelos, este resultado experimental foi significativamente melhorado.', 'fr': "Cette tâche partagée est une tâche typique de réponse aux questions. Comparé au système normal de questions et réponses, il doit donner la réponse à la question en fonction du texte fourni. L'essence du problème est en fait la compréhension écrite. En général, il y a plusieurs questions pour chaque texte qui lui correspond. Et pour chaque question, il y a deux réponses candidates (et une seule d'entre elles est correcte). Pour résoudre ce problème, l'approche habituelle consiste à utiliser des réseaux de neurones convolutifs (CNN) et des réseaux de neurones récurrents (RNN) ou leurs modèles améliorés (tels que la mémoire à long terme (LSTM)). Dans cet article, un modèle CNN-LSTM basé sur l'attention est proposé pour cette tâche. En ajoutant un mécanisme d'attention et en combinant les deux modèles, ce résultat expérimental a été considérablement amélioré.", 'ja': 'この共有タスクは、典型的な質問応答タスクです。通常の質問・回答システムと比較して、提供されたテキストに基づいて質問に回答する必要があります。問題の本質は読解力です通常、それに対応するテキストごとにいくつかの質問があります。各質問について、候補者の答えは2つあります（正解は1つのみです）。この問題を解決するために、通常のアプローチは、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ ＣＮＮ ）及び再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ ＲＮＮ ）、またはそれらの改善されたモデル（長期短期メモリ（ ＬＳＴＭ ）など）を使用することである。本論文では、この課題について注意に基づくCNN - LSTMモデルが提案されている。注意メカニズムを追加し、2つのモデルを組み合わせることで、この実験結果は大幅に改善されました。', 'zh': '此共享者,典刑之问答也。 比之问答系统,据文本给对。 其质实读解。 常文本皆有数应。 每事有二候选答案(其一是)。 所以然者,常用卷积神经网络(CNN)、递归神经网络(RNN)、改入之法(如长短期记(LSTM))。 本条上CNN-LSTM体。 因加意机而合两模,实验得显改。', 'ru': 'Эта совместная задача является типичной задачей с ответом на вопросы. По сравнению с обычной системой вопросов и ответов, она должна дать ответ на вопрос на основе предоставленного текста. Суть проблемы заключается в понимании прочитанного. Как правило, есть несколько вопросов для каждого текста, которые соответствуют ему. И на каждый вопрос есть два ответа-кандидата (и только один из них правильный). Для решения этой задачи обычно используется сверточная нейронная сеть (CNN) и рекуррентная нейронная сеть (RNN) или их усовершенствованные модели (такие как длинная кратковременная память (LSTM)). В настоящем документе для этой задачи предлагается модель CNN-LSTM, основанная на учете внимания. Добавив механизм внимания и объединив две модели, этот экспериментальный результат был значительно улучшен.', 'hi': 'यह साझा किया गया कार्य एक विशिष्ट प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाला कार्य है. सामान्य प्रश्न और उत्तर प्रणाली की तुलना में, इसे प्रदान किए गए पाठ के आधार पर प्रश्न का उत्तर देने की आवश्यकता है। समस्या का सार वास्तव में समझ पढ़ना है। आमतौर पर, प्रत्येक पाठ के लिए कई प्रश्न होते हैं जो इसके अनुरूप होते हैं। और प्रत्येक प्रश्न के लिए, दो उम्मीदवार उत्तर हैं (और उनमें से केवल एक ही सही है)। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, सामान्य दृष्टिकोण convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) और आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (RNN) या उनके बेहतर मॉडल (जैसे लंबे समय तक अल्पकालिक स्मृति (LSTM)) का उपयोग करना है। इस पेपर में, इस कार्य के लिए एक ध्यान-आधारित सीएनएन-एलएसटीएम मॉडल प्रस्तावित है। एक ध्यान तंत्र जोड़कर और दो मॉडलों के संयोजन से, इस प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम में काफी सुधार हुआ है।', 'ga': 'Is gnáth-thasc freagra ceiste é an tasc roinnte seo. I gcomparáid leis an ngnáthchóras ceisteanna agus freagraí, ní mór dó freagra na ceiste a thabhairt bunaithe ar an téacs a chuirtear ar fáil. Is é croílár na faidhbe i ndáiríre léamhthuiscint. Go hiondúil, bíonn roinnt ceisteanna ann do gach téacs a fhreagraíonn dó. Agus do gach ceist, tá dhá fhreagra iarrthóra (agus níl ach ceann amháin acu ceart). Chun an fhadhb seo a réiteach, is é an cur chuige is gnách ná líonraí néaracha réitigh (CNN) agus líonra néarach athfhillteach (RNN) nó a samhlacha feabhsaithe a úsáid (cosúil le cuimhne fadtéarmach gearrthéarmach (LSTM)). Sa pháipéar seo, moltar samhail CNN-LSTM atá bunaithe ar aird don tasc seo. Trí mheicníocht aird a chur leis agus an dá mhúnla a chomhcheangal, feabhsaíodh an toradh turgnamhach seo go suntasach.', 'el': 'Αυτή η κοινή εργασία είναι μια τυπική εργασία απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις. Σε σύγκριση με το κανονικό σύστημα ερωτήσεων και απαντήσεων, πρέπει να δώσει την απάντηση στην ερώτηση με βάση το παρεχόμενο κείμενο. Η ουσία του προβλήματος είναι στην πραγματικότητα η κατανόηση ανάγνωσης. Συνήθως, υπάρχουν αρκετές ερωτήσεις για κάθε κείμενο που αντιστοιχούν σε αυτό. Και για κάθε ερώτηση, υπάρχουν δύο υποψήφιες απαντήσεις (και μόνο μία από αυτές είναι σωστή). Για να επιλυθεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, η συνήθης προσέγγιση είναι η χρήση σύνθετων νευρωνικών δικτύων (CNN) και επαναλαμβανόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων (RNN) ή βελτιωμένων μοντέλων τους (όπως η μακροπρόθεσμη βραχυπρόθεσμη μνήμη (LSTM)). Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνεται ένα μοντέλο βασισμένο στην προσοχή για το έργο αυτό. Με την προσθήκη ενός μηχανισμού προσοχής και τον συνδυασμό των δύο μοντέλων, αυτό το πειραματικό αποτέλεσμα βελτιώθηκε σημαντικά.', 'ka': 'ეს საზოგადომი დავალება ტიპიური კითხვა საქაღალდე. ნორმალური კითხვა და პასუხის სისტემისთან შემდგომარებული, მას უნდა გაუკეთოთ კითხვის პასუხი, რომელიც მიეყენებული ტექსტისთან დაბათებული. პრობლემის სინამდვილეობა საკითხვა. ყოველ ტექსტისთვის რამდენიმე კითხვები არიან, რომლებიც მის შესაბამისად. და ყოველ კითხვისთვის, აქვს ორი კანდიდენტის პასუხი (და მხოლოდ ერთი მათგანი მარტივია). ამ პრობლემას გასაუკეთებლად, საუკეთესო პრობლემა არის კონგულოციალური ნეიროლური ქსელი (CNN) და რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელი (RNN) ან მათი გაუკეთებული მოდელები (მაგალითად კრძ ამ დოკუნტში, CNN-LSTM მოდელი დაახლოებით ამ დავალებისთვის. ამ ექსპერიმენტის შედეგება ძალიან უკეთესებულია.', 'it': "Questo compito condiviso è un compito tipico di risposta alle domande. Rispetto al normale sistema di domande e risposte, deve dare la risposta alla domanda in base al testo fornito. L'essenza del problema è in realtà la comprensione della lettura. In genere, ci sono diverse domande per ogni testo che corrispondono ad esso. E per ogni domanda, ci sono due risposte candidate (e solo una di esse è corretta). Per risolvere questo problema, l'approccio usuale è quello di utilizzare le reti neurali convoluzionali (CNN) e le reti neurali ricorrenti (RNN) o i loro modelli migliorati (come la memoria a lungo termine (LSTM)). In questo articolo, un modello CNN-LSTM basato sull'attenzione è proposto per questo compito. Aggiungendo un meccanismo di attenzione e combinando i due modelli, questo risultato sperimentale è stato significativamente migliorato.", 'lt': 'Ši bendra užduotis yra tipiška užduotis atsakyti į klausimus. Palyginti su įprasta klausimų ir atsakymų sistema, ji turi pateikti atsakymą į pateiktą klausimą. Problemos esmė yra supratimo skaitymas. Paprastai kiekvienam tekstui kyla keletas klausimų. Kiekviename klausime yra du kandidatų atsakymai (ir tik vienas iš jų teisingas). Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, įprastas metodas yra naudoti konvoliucinius nervinius tinklus (CNN) ir pasikartojantį nervinį tinklą (RNN) arba jų patobulintus modelius (pvz., ilgalaikę trumpalaikę atmintinę (LSTM)). Šiame dokumente šiam uždaviniui siūlomas dėmesiu grindžiamas CNN-LSTM model is. Pridėjus dėmesio mechanizmą ir derinant šiuos du modelius, šis eksperimentinis rezultatas buvo gerokai pagerintas.', 'mk': 'Оваа заедничка задача е типична задача на одговор на прашања. Во споредба со нормалниот систем на прашања и одговори, тој мора да даде одговор на прашањето врз основа на обезбедениот текст. Всушност, суштината на проблемот е да се чита разбирање. Typically, there are several questions for each text that correspond to it.  И за секое прашање, има два кандидатски одговори (и само еден од нив е точен). За решавање на овој проблем, вообичаениот пристап е да се користат конволуционалните нервни мрежи (ЦНН) и рецидентната нервна мрежа (РНН) или нивните подобрени модели (како што е долгорочната меморија (ЛСТМ)). Во овој документ, за оваа задача е предложен модел на CNN-LSTM базиран на внимание. Со додавање механизам на внимание и комбинација на двата модели, овој експериментален резултат е значително подобрен.', 'hu': 'Ez a megosztott feladat egy tipikus kérdésre válaszoló feladat. A normál kérdés- és válaszrendszerrel összehasonlítva a kérdésre a benyújtott szöveg alapján kell választ adnia. A probléma lényege az olvasás megértése. Általában minden szöveghez több kérdés van, amely megfelel neki. És minden kérdésre két jelölt válasz van (és csak az egyik helyes). A probléma megoldásához a szokásos megközelítés a konvolúciós neurális hálózatok (CNN) és a visszatérő neurális hálózatok (RNN) használata, illetve ezek továbbfejlesztett modellek (mint például hosszú rövid távú memória (LSTM)). Ebben a tanulmányban egy figyelem alapú CNN-LSTM modellt javasolunk erre a feladatra. A figyelemmechanizmus hozzáadásával és a két modell kombinációjával jelentősen javult ez a kísérleti eredmény.', 'ml': 'പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ജോലി സാധാരണ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചെയ്യുന്നതാണ്. സാധാരണ ചോദ്യത്തോടും ഉത്തരം സിസ്റ്റത്തോടും താരതമ്യം ചെയ്താല്\u200d, നല്\u200dകിയ വാചകത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് ചോദ്യത് പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമെന്താണെന്നാല്\u200d പ്രശ്നം വായിക്കുന്നത്. Typically, there are several questions for each text that correspond to it.  ഓരോ ചോദ്യത്തിനും രണ്ടു പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ഉത്തരം (ഒന്നില്\u200d ഒന്ന് ശരിയാണ്) ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന് പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധാരണ നടപടിയാണ് ക്രമീകരമായ നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത്, പിന്നെ തിരിച്ചുവരുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഈ ജോലിക്കായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന CNN-LSTM മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലം വളരെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'kk': 'Бұл ортақ тапсырма - қалыпты сұрақ жауап беру тапсырмасы. Кәдімгі сұрақ жүйесі мен жауап беру жүйесіне сәйкес, келтірілген мәтіннің негізінде жауап беру керек. Мәселедің негізі - түсінікті оқу. Әдетте, әрбір мәтін үшін бірнеше сұрақ бар. Әрбір сұрақ үшін екі кандидатты жауап бар (және олардың бірі дұрыс емес). Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін кәдімгі жағдай - конверсиялық невралды желі (CNN) және қайталанатын невралды желі (RNN) немесе олардың жақсы үлгілерін (қысқа уақыт жады (LSTM) қолдану. Бұл қағазда CNN-LSTM үлгісі тапсырманың үшін қолданылады. Бұл эксперименттік нәтижесі өте жақсартылды.', 'ms': 'Tugas berkongsi ini adalah tugas menjawab soalan biasa. Berbanding dengan sistem soalan dan jawapan biasa, ia perlu memberikan jawapan kepada soalan berdasarkan teks yang diberikan. Intinya adalah membaca pemahaman. Typically, there are several questions for each text that correspond to it.  Dan bagi tiap-tiap soalan, terdapat dua jawapan calon. Untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini, pendekatan biasa ialah menggunakan rangkaian saraf konvolutional (CNN) dan rangkaian saraf berulang (RNN) atau model yang diperbaiki (seperti memori jangka pendek panjang (LSTM)). Dalam kertas ini, model CNN-LSTM berdasarkan perhatian diusulkan untuk tugas ini. Dengan menambah mekanisme perhatian dan menggabungkan kedua-dua model, hasil percubaan ini telah diperbaiki dengan signifikan.', 'mt': 'Dan il-kompitu kondiviż huwa kompitu tipiku li jwieġeb għall-mistoqsijiet. Meta mqabbel mas-sistema normali ta’ mistoqsijiet u tweġibiet, jeħtieġ li jagħti t-tweġiba għall-mistoqsija bbażata fuq it-test ipprovdut. L-essenza tal-problema fil-fatt hija l-qari tal-fehim. Tipikament, hemm diversi mistoqsijiet għal kull test li jikkorrispondu miegħu. U għal kull mistoqsija, hemm żewġ tweġibiet kandidati (u waħda minnhom biss hija korretta). Biex tiġi solvuta din il-problema, l-approċċ tas-soltu huwa li jintużaw netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali (CNN) u netwerk newrali rikorrenti (RNN) jew il-mudelli mtejba tagħhom (bħall-memorja fit-tul fuq perjodu qasir (LSTM)). F’dan id-dokument, mudell CNN-LSTM ibbażat fuq l-attenzjoni huwa propost għal dan il-kompitu. Permezz taż-żieda ta’ mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni u l-kombinazzjoni taż-żewġ mudelli, dan ir-riżultat sperimentali tjieb b’mod sinifikanti.', 'mn': 'Энэ хуваалцах үйл ажиллагаа бол энгийн асуулт хариулах үйл ажиллагаа. Энгийн асуулт болон хариулт системтэй харьцуулахад хариулт өгсөн текст дээр үндсэн асуултыг өгөх хэрэгтэй. Үнэндээ асуудлын суурь нь ойлголтыг унших юм. Яг энгийн үед, мәтін бүрт холбоотой олон асуулт байдаг. Харин асуулт бүрт хоёр удирдагчийн хариулт байна (тэдгээрийн нэг нь зөв). Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд, энгийн арга нь холбоотой мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (CNN) болон дахин дахин сэтгэл сүлжээг (RNN) эсвэл сайжруулсан загваруудыг ашиглах юм. Энэ цаасан дээр анхаарлын үндсэн CNN-LSTM загвар энэ ажил дээр санал өгдөг. Энэ туршилтын үр дүнг маш сайжруулсан.', 'no': 'Denne delte oppgåva er ein typisk spørsmål som svarar på oppgåva. Sammenlignet med den vanlege spørsmålsystemet og svarsystemet må det gje svaret på spørsmålet basert på den oppgjevne teksten. Grunnlegget til problemet er å lesa forståelse. Vanlegvis er det fleire spørsmål for kvar tekst som tilsvarar det. Og for kvar spørsmål er det to kandidatsvar (og berre ein av dei er rett). For å løysa dette problemet, er den vanlege tilnærminga å bruka konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk (CNN) og rekurserande neuralnettverk (RNN) eller dei forbetre modelane (slik som langsiktige minne (LSTM)). I denne papiret foreslår ein oppmerksbasert CNN-LSTM-modell for denne oppgåva. Ved å leggja til ein oppmerksmekanisme og kombinerera dei to modelane, er denne eksperimentelle resultatet betydelig forbetra.', 'pl': 'To wspólne zadanie jest typowym zadaniem odpowiedzi na pytania. W porównaniu z normalnym systemem pytań i odpowiedzi, musi on udzielić odpowiedzi na pytanie w oparciu o dostarczony tekst. Istotą problemu jest faktycznie czytanie zrozumienia. Zazwyczaj istnieje kilka pytań dla każdego tekstu, które mu odpowiadają. I dla każdego pytania są dwie odpowiedzi kandydatów (i tylko jedna z nich jest poprawna). Aby rozwiązać ten problem, zwykłym podejściem jest zastosowanie konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych (CNN) i rekrutującej sieci neuronowej (RNN) lub ich ulepszonych modeli (takich jak pamięć długoterminowa (LSTM)). W artykule zaproponowano do tego zadania model CNN-LSTM oparty na uwadze. Poprzez dodanie mechanizmu uwagi i połączenie dwóch modeli ten wynik eksperymentalny został znacznie poprawiony.', 'ro': 'Această sarcină partajată este o sarcină tipică de răspuns la întrebări. În comparație cu sistemul normal de întrebări și răspunsuri, acesta trebuie să dea răspunsul la întrebare pe baza textului furnizat. Esența problemei este de fapt înțelegerea cititului. De obicei, există mai multe întrebări pentru fiecare text care corespund acestuia. Și pentru fiecare întrebare, există două răspunsuri candidate (și numai unul dintre ele este corect). Pentru a rezolva această problemă, abordarea obișnuită este utilizarea rețelelor neuronale convoluționale (CNN) și a rețelelor neuronale recurente (RNN) sau a modelelor lor îmbunătățite (cum ar fi memoria pe termen scurt (LSTM)). În această lucrare, un model CNN-LSTM bazat pe atenție este propus pentru această sarcină. Prin adăugarea unui mecanism de atenție și combinarea celor două modele, acest rezultat experimental a fost îmbunătățit semnificativ.', 'sr': 'Ovaj zajednièki zadatak je tipičan odgovor na pitanje. U usporedbi sa normalnim pitanjem i odgovornim sistemom, mora odgovoriti na pitanje na temelju pruženog teksta. U stvari, suština problema je èitanje razumevanja. Obično postoji nekoliko pitanja za svaki tekst koji odgovara tome. I za svako pitanje, postoje dva odgovora kandidata (i samo jedan od njih je ispravan). Za rešenje ovog problema, uobičajeni pristup je koristiti konvolucionalne neuralne mreže (CNN) i recidivnu neuralnu mrežu (RNN) ili njihove poboljšane modele (poput dugoročne memorije (LSTM)). U ovom papiru je predložen model na pažnji CNN-LSTM za ovaj zadatak. Dodajući mehanizam pažnje i kombinaciju dva modela, ovaj eksperimentalni rezultat je značajno poboljšan.', 'so': "This shared task is a typical question answering task.  Isbarbarbardhig suuqa caadiga ah iyo nidaamka jawaabta waxaa u baahan in jawaabta su'aalka ku jawaabo warqada lagu qoray. Dhibaatada muhiimka ah waa akhriska aasaasiga ah. Inta badan waxaa laga helaa su'aalo badan oo ku habboon text kasta. Mid walbana wax buu ku jawaabaa (mid oo keliya waa hagaagsan). Si loo xalliyo dhibaatadan, qaababka caadiga ah waa in lagu isticmaalo shabakada neurada ee kamid ah (CNN) iyo sidoo kale shabakadda neurada (RNN) ama tilmaamaha hore (tusaale ahaan xusuusta waqtiga gaaban (LSTM). Qoraalkan waxaa lagu soo jeedaa sameyn CNN-LSTM oo ku saleysan. Sida lagu daro qalabka கவriska iyo isku darida labada noocyo, sababtan jirrabka waxaa lagu beddelay mid aad u weyn.", 'sv': 'Den här delade uppgiften är en typisk frågesvarsuppgift. Jämfört med det vanliga fråge- och svarssystemet måste det ge svaret på frågan baserat på den text som tillhandahålls. Kärnan i problemet är faktiskt läsförståelse. Vanligtvis finns det flera frågor för varje text som motsvarar den. Och för varje fråga finns det två kandidatsvar (och bara ett av dem är korrekt). För att lösa detta problem är det vanliga tillvägagångssättet att använda konvulutionella neurala nätverk (CNN) och återkommande neurala nätverk (RNN) eller deras förbättrade modeller (såsom långtidsminne (LSTM)). I denna uppsats föreslås en uppmärksamhetsbaserad CNN-LSTM-modell för denna uppgift. Genom att lägga till en uppmärksamhetsmekanism och kombinera de två modellerna har detta experimentella resultat förbättrats avsevärt.', 'si': 'මේ වැදගත් වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ උත්තර පද්ධතිය සමග, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයට උත්තර දෙන්න ඕනේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයට ප්\u200dරශ්නය දෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇත්තටම තේරුම් කියනවා. සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට, හැම පාළුවෙක්ම සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම වෙනුවෙන්, ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් තියෙනවා (ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ගෙන් එකක් හරි). මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තර කරන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නය තමයි සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (CNN) සහ ආපහු ප්\u200dරශ්නය න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (RNN) සහ ඔවුන්ගේ  මේ පැත්තට, අවධානයේ CNN-LSTM මොඩල් එකක් මේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් සැලසුම් කරනවා. අවධාන පද්ධතියක් එකතු කරලා මොඩේල් දෙකක් එකතු කරලා, මේ පරීක්ෂණ පද්ධතිය ගොඩක් වැඩ කරලා තියෙනවා.', 'ta': 'இந்த பகிர்ந்த பணி வழங்கப்பட்ட செயல் பதில் கேள்வியை வழக்கமாகும். Compared with the normal question and answer system, it needs to give the answer to the question based on the text provided.  பிரச்சனையின் முக்கியம் உண்மையில் குழுக்கம் படிக்கிறது. பொதுவாக, ஒவ்வொரு உரைக்கும் பொருத்தமான கேள்விகள் உள்ளன. ஒவ்வொரு கேள்விக்கும், இரண்டு தேர்ந்தெடுப்பாளர் விடைகள் உள்ளன (ஒன்று மட்டும் சரியானது) இந்த பிரச்சனையை தீர்க்க வழக்கமான வழிமுறையாகும் சாதாரண புதிய பிணையம் (CNN) மற்றும் திரும்பப் புதிய பிணையம் (RNN) அல்லது மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் ( இந்த காகிதத்தில், இந்த பணிக்கான கவனம் அடிப்படையில் CNN-LSTM மாதிரி பரிந்துரைக்கப்படுகிறது. ஒரு கவனம் முறைமையை சேர்த்து இரண்டு மாதிரிகளை ஒன்று சேர்த்து, இந்த சோதனையின் முடிவு மிக மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டது.', 'ur': 'یہ مشترک کام ایک معمولی سوال ہے جو جواب دیتا ہے۔ سؤال اور جواب سیسٹم کے ساتھ مقایسہ کیا گیا ہے، اس کی ضرورت ہے کہ اس سؤال کی جواب دیں جو مقرر کیا گیا ہے. مسئلہ کی بنیادی حقیقت یہ ہے کہ سمجھ پڑھنا ہے معمولاً ہر متن کے لئے بہت سے سوال ہیں جو اس کے ساتھ ملتے ہیں. اور ہر سوال کے لئے دو جواب دینے والے ہیں اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے، معمول طریقہ یہ ہے کہ کانولوژن نیورل نیورل نیٹورک (CNN) اور دوبارہ نیورل نیٹورک (RNN) یا ان کے بہترین نمڈلوں (جیسے لنگتنی مہمانی (LSTM) کا استعمال کرنا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، اس کام کے لئے ایک توجه کی بنیادی CNN-LSTM موڈل پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے. ایک متوجہ مکانیسم اور دو نمڈلوں کو جمع کرنے کے ذریعہ، یہ آزمائش نتیجہ بہت اضافہ کیا گیا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu boʻlishilgan vazifa vazifani oddiy savol. Oddiy savol va javob tizimi bilan kamaytirish kerak. Joʻnatilgan matn asosida javob berishi kerak. muammolar asosiy muammolarni o'qish mumkin. Oddiy, har bir matn uchun bir necha savol bor. Ва ҳар бир саволдан эса, икковларидан жавоб бермоқда. Bu muammolarni solash uchun oddiy usul, butun umumiy neyrol tarmoqlaridan (CNN) ishlatish va qaytadan tarmoq (RNN) yoki ularning o'zgartirilgan modellari (juda qisqa xotira (LSTM) kabi). Bu qogʻozda, bu vazifaning asosiy CNN-LSTM modeli rivojlanadi. Ikki modellarni birlashtirish uchun, bu tajriba natijasi juda katta yaxshi ko'paydi.", 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ chia sẻ này là một nhiệm vụ trả lời câu hỏi điển hình. So với hệ thống câu hỏi và trả lời bình thường, nó cần phải trả lời câu hỏi dựa trên văn bản đã đưa ra. Vấn đề chính là sự thấu hiểu. Thông thường, có vài câu hỏi cho mỗi chữ tương ứng với nó. Và cho mỗi câu hỏi, có hai câu trả lời ứng cử viên (và chỉ một trong số đó là đúng). Để giải quyết vấn đề này, phương pháp thông thường là sử dụng các mạng thần kinh xoắn (CNN) và mạng thần kinh liên tục (RNN) hay các mô hình nâng cấp của chúng (như bộ nhớ ngắn hạn (LSTM). Trong bài báo này, một mô hình dựa trên CNN-HTTM được đề xuất cho nhiệm vụ này. Kết quả thử nghiệm này đã được cải thiện đáng kể.', 'bg': 'Тази споделена задача е типична задача за отговор на въпроси. В сравнение с нормалната система за въпроси и отговори, тя трябва да даде отговор на въпроса въз основа на предоставения текст. Същността на проблема всъщност е разбирането за четене. Обикновено има няколко въпроса за всеки текст, които съответстват на него. И за всеки въпрос има два отговора на кандидатите (и само един от тях е правилен). За решаване на този проблем обичайният подход е да се използват конволюционни невронни мрежи (CNN) и повтарящи се невронни мрежи (RNN) или техните подобрени модели (като дългосрочна краткосрочна памет (LSTM)). В настоящата статия за тази задача е предложен модел, базиран на вниманието. Чрез добавяне на механизъм за внимание и комбиниране на двата модела този експериментален резултат е значително подобрен.', 'nl': 'Deze gedeelde taak is een typische taak voor het beantwoorden van vragen. Vergeleken met het normale vraag- en antwoordsysteem, moet het antwoord op de vraag geven op basis van de verstrekte tekst. De essentie van het probleem is eigenlijk leesbegrip. Meestal zijn er meerdere vragen voor elke tekst die overeenkomen met de tekst. En voor elke vraag zijn er twee kandidaat-antwoorden (en slechts één is correct). Om dit probleem op te lossen, is de gebruikelijke aanpak gebruik te maken van convolutional neural networks (CNN) en recidivierend neural network (RNN) of hun verbeterde modellen (zoals long short-term memory (LSTM)). In dit artikel wordt een op aandacht gebaseerd CNN-LSTM model voorgesteld voor deze taak. Door het toevoegen van een aandachtsmechanisme en het combineren van de twee modellen is dit experimentele resultaat aanzienlijk verbeterd.', 'hr': 'Ovaj zajednički zadatak je tipičan odgovor na pitanje. U usporedbi s normalnim pitanjem i sustavom odgovora, mora dati odgovor na pitanje na temelju pruženog teksta. U stvari, suština problema je čitanje razumijevanja. Obično postoji nekoliko pitanja za svaki tekst koji odgovara tome. I za svako pitanje postoje dva odgovora kandidata (i samo jedan od njih je ispravan). Za rješavanje ovog problema, uobičajeni pristup je koristiti konvolucionalne neuralne mreže (CNN) i rekonstruirane neuralne mreže (RNN) ili njihove poboljšane modele (poput dugoročne sjećanja (LSTM)). U ovom papiru predlaže se model na pažnji CNN-LSTM za ovaj zadatak. Dodajući mehanizam pažnje i kombinaciju dva modela, ovaj eksperimentalni rezultat je značajno poboljšan.', 'de': 'Diese gemeinsame Aufgabe ist eine typische Aufgabe zur Beantwortung von Fragen. Im Vergleich zum normalen Frage- und Antwortsystem muss es die Antwort auf die Frage auf der Grundlage des bereitgestellten Textes geben. Die Essenz des Problems ist eigentlich Leseverstehen. Typischerweise gibt es für jeden Text mehrere Fragen, die ihm entsprechen. Und für jede Frage gibt es zwei Kandidaten Antworten (und nur eine davon ist richtig). Um dieses Problem zu lösen, ist der übliche Ansatz, convolutional neural networks (CNN) und recidivierend neural networks (RNN) oder deren verbesserte Modelle (wie z.B. langes Kurzzeitgedächtnis (LSTM)) zu verwenden. In dieser Arbeit wird ein aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes CNN-LSTM Modell für diese Aufgabe vorgeschlagen. Durch das Hinzufügen eines Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus und die Kombination der beiden Modelle konnte dieses experimentelle Ergebnis signifikant verbessert werden.', 'da': 'Denne delte opgave er en typisk spørgsmålsbesvarelsesopgave. Sammenlignet med det normale spørgsmål- og besvarelsessystem skal det give svaret på spørgsmålet baseret på teksten. Essensen af problemet er faktisk læseforståelse. Typisk er der flere spørgsmål til hver tekst, der svarer til den. Og for hvert spørgsmål er der to kandidatsvar (og kun et af dem er korrekt). For at løse dette problem er den sædvanlige tilgang at bruge konvulutionelle neurale netværk (CNN) og tilbagevendende neurale netværk (RNN) eller deres forbedrede modeller (såsom lang korttidshukommelse (LSTM)). I denne artikel foreslås en opmærksomhedsbaseret CNN-LSTM model til denne opgave. Ved at tilføje en opmærksomhedsmekanisme og kombinere de to modeller er dette eksperimentelle resultat blevet betydeligt forbedret.', 'id': 'Tugas berbagi ini adalah tugas yang tipis menjawab pertanyaan. Berbanding dengan sistem pertanyaan dan jawaban normal, ia perlu memberikan jawaban kepada pertanyaan berdasarkan teks yang diberikan. Intinya adalah membaca pemahaman. Biasanya, ada beberapa pertanyaan untuk setiap teks yang sesuai dengan itu. Dan untuk setiap pertanyaan, ada dua jawaban kandidat (dan hanya salah satu dari mereka benar). Untuk memecahkan masalah ini, pendekatan biasa adalah menggunakan jaringan neural konvolusi (CNN) dan jaringan neural rekuren (RNN) atau model yang terbaik (seperti ingatan jangka pendek panjang (LSTM)). Dalam kertas ini, model CNN-LSTM berdasarkan perhatian diusulkan untuk tugas ini. Dengan menambahkan mekanisme perhatian dan menggabungkan dua model, hasil percobaan ini telah meningkat jauh.', 'fa': 'این کار مشترک یک جواب سوال معمولی است. در مقایسه با سیستم سوال و جواب معمولی، باید جواب به سؤال بر اساس متن داده شود. بنیادی مشکل در واقع خواندن درک است. معمولاً برای هر متن چندین سوال وجود دارد که با آن ارتباط دارد. و برای هر سوال، دو جواب کاندیده (و تنها یکی از آنها درست است). برای حل این مشکل، روش معمولی استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی (CNN) و شبکه عصبی (RNN) و مدل\u200cهای پیشرفته\u200cشان (مثل حافظه کوتاهی (LSTM) است. در این کاغذ، یک مدل بنیاد توجه CNN-LSTM برای این کار پیشنهاد می\u200cشود. با افزودن یک مکانیسم توجه و ترکیب دو مدل، این نتیجه آزمایشی بسیار بهتر شده است.', 'ko': '이 공유 임무는 전형적인 문답 임무다.일반적인 퀴즈 시스템에 비해 제공된 텍스트에 따라 문제의 답을 제시해야 한다.문제의 본질은 읽기와 이해이다.통상적으로 이에 대응하는 문장마다 몇 가지 문제가 있다.문제마다 두 개의 후보 답안이 있다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 일반적인 방법은 권적신경망(CNN)과 귀속신경망(RNN)이나 그것들의 개선모델(예를 들어 장단시간기억(LSTM)을 사용하는 것이다.본고는 주의를 바탕으로 하는 CNN-LSTM 모델을 제시했다.주의 메커니즘을 첨가하고 이 두 모델을 결합함으로써 실험 결과는 현저하게 개선되었다.', 'af': "Hierdie gedeelde taak is 'n tipiese vraag antwoord op taak. Vergelyk met die normale vraag en antwoord stelsel, dit moet die antwoord aan die vraag gegee op die verskaf teks. Die esensie van die probleem is eintlik lees van verstanding. Tipe is daar verskeie vrae vir elke teks wat ooreenstem met dit. En vir elke vraag is daar twee kandidate antwoorde (en slegs een van hulle is korrek). Om hierdie probleem te los, is die gewone toegang om konvolusionele neuralnetwerke (CNN) en herhaalde neuralnetwerk (RNN) te gebruik of hulle verbeterde modele (soos lang kort-tyd geheue (LSTM)). In hierdie papier word 'n aandag-gebaseerde CNN-LSTM model voorgestel vir hierdie taak. Deur 'n aandag mekanisme te voeg en die twee modele te kombinerer, is hierdie eksperimentale resultaat betekeurig verbeter.", 'sw': 'Kazi hii inayoshirikishwa ni swali la kawaida la kujibu kazi. Kulinganishwa na swali la kawaida na mfumo wa jibu, inahitaji kutoa jibu la swali kwa msingi wa maandishi yanayotolewa. Umuhimu wa tatizo ni kusoma ufahamu. Kwa kawaida, kuna maswali kadhaa kwa kila maandishi yanayojibu. Na kwa kila swali, kuna majibu mawili ya wagombea (moja tu ni sahihi). Ili kutatua tatizo hili, mbinu za kawaida ni kutumia mitandao ya kikatili ya neura (CNN) na kurejea mtandao wa neura (RNN) au mifano yao ya maboresho (kama vile kumbukumbu ya muda mfupi (LSTM)). Katika karatasi hii, muundo wa CNN-LSTM unapendekezwa kwa kazi hii. Kwa kuongeza mfumo wa kutangaza na kuunganisha mifano hizo mbili, matokeo haya ya majaribio yamekuwa yakiendelea vizuri sana.', 'sq': "Kjo detyrë e përbashkët është një detyrë tipike që përgjigjet pyetjeve. Në krahasim me sistemin normal të pyetjeve dhe përgjigjeve, ai duhet t'i japë përgjigjen pyetjes bazuar në tekstin e dhënë. The essence of the problem is actually reading comprehension.  Zakonisht, ka disa pyetje për çdo tekst që korrespondojnë me të. Për çdo pyetje ka dy përgjigje kandidate. Për të zgjidhur këtë problem, qasja e zakonshme është të përdoret rrjeti nervor konvolutiv (CNN) dhe rrjeti nervor recurrent (RNN) ose modelet e tyre të përmirësuara (të tilla si kujtesa afat-shkurtër (LSTM)). Në këtë letër propozohet një model CNN-LSTM bazuar në vëmendje për këtë detyrë. Duke shtuar një mekanizëm vëmendjeje dhe duke kombinuar të dy modelet, ky rezultat eksperimental është përmirësuar ndjeshëm.", 'hy': 'This shared task is a typical question answering task.  Համեմատելով նորմալ հարցի և պատասխանի համակարգին, այն պետք է պատասխանի տա հարցին, որը հիմնված է տրված տեքստի վրա: Խնդիրն իրականում ընկալումն է: Սովորաբար, յուրաքանչյուր տեքստի համար կան մի քանի հարցեր, որոնք համապատասխանում են դրան: Եվ յուրաքանչյուր հարցի համար կան երկու թեկնածու պատասխաններ (և դրանցից միայն մեկը ճիշտ է): Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար սովորական մոտեցումը համընդհանուր նյարդային ցանցեր (CNN) և կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցեր (ARN) օգտագործելն է, կամ նրանց բարելավված մոդելներ (ինչպիսիք են երկար կարճ ժամկետ հիշողությունը (LSMT)։ Այս աշխատանքում առաջարկում է ուշադրության վրա հիմնված CNN-LSMT մոդել այս խնդրի համար: Ուշադրության մեխանիզմ ավելացնելով և երկու մոդելները համադրելով, այս փորձարկման արդյունքը կարևոր բարելավվել է:', 'am': 'ይህ የተካፈለ ስራ የተጠቃሚ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ የተለመደ ጥያቄ እና የመልስ ጥያቄ ስርዓት በተደረገ ጥያቄን በጽሑፍ ላይ ለመቀበል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የጭንቀት ውጤት መፍጠር ነው:: በተጨማሪው፣ ለሁሉም ጽሑፍ የሚደግፉት ብዙ ጥያቄዎች አሉ፡፡ ለሁሉም ጥያቄ ሁለት የአማላጆች መልስ አለ፤ አንዱም ብቻ እውነተኛ ነው። ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመፈጸም፣ የጠቃሚ ልግስና የጠቅላላ የጥረት መረብ (CNN) እና በጥያቄ መረብ (RNN) ወይም የበለጠ ሞዴላዎችን (እንደ ረጅም የረዘመ ማስታወስ (LSTM) ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የCNN-LSTM ሞዴል ለዚህ ስራ የተመሳሳይ ነው፡፡ በሁለቱ ሞዴላዎችን በመጨመር ይህ ፈተና ፍጻሜ እጅግ ተሻግሮአል፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu paýlaşan zady adatça soragy jogap bermekdir. Adatça sorag we jogap sistemi bilen gurlaşdyrylşy, ol sora berilen metin üstine jogap bermeli Meseläniň esasy aslynda düşünmesi okamak. Adatça, her metin üçin birnäçe soragy bar. We her soragy üçin 2 sany ajaýyp jogap bar (we diňe biri dogry). Bu meseleni çözmek üçin, adatça ýagdaýyň ködleşikli näyral şebekeleri (CNN) we ýene-täsirli näyral şebekeleri (RNN) ýa olaryň gelişmiş modellerini (ýöne kiçi-täsirli ýagdaýynyň (LSTM) ulanmakdyr. Bu kagyzda, CNN-LSTM tabanly bir nusga bu zada üçin teklip edildi. Bir üns meýdançasyny ekleýän we iki nusgany birleşdirmek üçin bu synanym netijesi örän gowylaşdyryldy.', 'az': 'Bu paylaŇüńĪlmńĪŇü iŇüin tipik bir sual cavab ver…ôn iŇüidir. Normal sual v…ô cevap sistemi il…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪldńĪ, bu suala veril…ôn m…ôtn √ľz…ôrind…ô d…ôyiŇüdiril…ôn cavab verm…ôlidir. Problemin …ôslind…ô anlaŇüńĪlmasńĪ oxumaqdńĪr. H…ôr m…ôktub √ľ√ß√ľn √ßox sual var. H…ôr sual √ľ√ß√ľn iki t…ôl…ôb cavab var (v…ô yalnńĪz birisi dońürudur). Bu problemi √ß…ôkm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, normal approach is to use convolutional neural networks (CNN) and recurrent neural network (RNN) or their improved models (such as long-term memory (LSTM)). Bu kańüńĪzda, CNN-LSTM modeli bu iŇüin √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôklif edilir. ńįki modell…ôri birl…ôŇüdir…ôr…ôk bu t…ôcr√ľb…ô n…ôtic…ôsi √ßox yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪ.', 'bs': 'Ovaj zajednički zadatak je tipičan odgovor na pitanje. U usporedbi sa normalnim pitanjem i sustavom odgovora, mora dati odgovor na pitanje na temelju pruženog teksta. U suštini problema je čitanje razumijevanja. Obično postoji nekoliko pitanja za svaki tekst koji odgovara tome. I za svako pitanje postoje dva odgovora kandidata. Za rješavanje ovog problema, uobičajeni pristup je koristiti konvolucione neuralne mreže (CNN) i rekonstruirane neuralne mreže (RNN) ili njihove poboljšane modele (poput dugoročne sjećanja (LSTM)). U ovom papiru je predložen model na pažnji CNN-LSTM za ovaj zadatak. Dodajući mehanizam pažnje i kombinaciju dva modela, ovaj eksperimentalni rezultat je značajno poboljšan.', 'ca': "Aquesta tasca compartida és una tasca típica de resposta a preguntes. Comparat amb el sistema normal de preguntes i respostes, ha de donar la resposta a la pregunta basada en el text proporcionat. L'essència del problema és llegir la comprensió. Normalment hi ha diverses preguntes per cada text que hi corresponden. I per cada pregunta hi ha dues respostes candidates (i només una d'elles és correcta). Per resoldre aquest problema, l'enfocament habitual és utilitzar xarxes neurals convolutives (CNN) i xarxes neurals recurrents (RNN) o els seus models millorats (com la memòria a curt termini (LSTM)). In this paper, an attention-based CNN-LSTM model is proposed for this task.  Aggregant un mecanisme d'atenció i combinant els dos models, aquest resultat experimental s'ha millorat significativament.", 'cs': 'Tento sdílený úkol je typickým úkolem zodpovězení otázek. Ve srovnání s běžným systémem otázek a odpovědí musí odpovědět na otázku na základě poskytnutého textu. Podstatou problému je vlastně čtení porozumění. Obvykle existuje několik otázek pro každý text, které mu odpovídají. A pro každou otázku existují dvě kandidátské odpovědi (a pouze jedna z nich je správná). K řešení tohoto problému je obvyklým přístupem použití konvolučních neuronových sítí (CNN) a recidivní neuronové sítě (RNN) nebo jejich vylepšených modelů (např. dlouhodobá krátkodobá paměť (LSTM)). V tomto článku je navržen CNN-LSTM model založený na pozornosti pro tento úkol. Přidáním pozornostního mechanismu a kombinací obou modelů byl tento experimentální výsledek výrazně zlepšen.', 'bn': 'এই শেয়ার করা কাজ একটি সাধারণ প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্ন। স্বাভাবিক প্রশ্ন এবং উত্তর সিস্টেমের সাথে তুলনায়, প্রদান করা লেখার উপর ভিত্তিক প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিতে হবে। The essence of the problem is actually reading comprehension.  সাধারণত, প্রত্যেক টেক্সটের জন্য বেশ কিছু প্রশ্ন আছে যা এর সাথে সাড়া দেয়। আর প্রত্যেক প্রশ্নের জন্য দুই প্রার্থীর উত্তর আছে (এবং তাদের মধ্যে একটা সঠিক। এই সমস্যার সমাধানের জন্য, সাধারণত স্বাভাবিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) ব্যবহার করা এবং পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (আরএনএন) অথবা তাদের উন্নত মডেল (যেমন দীর্ঘ মেমর এই কাগজটিতে এই কাজের জন্য একটি মনোযোগ প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে। এই পরীক্ষার ফলাফল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নত হয়েছে।', 'fi': 'Tämä jaettu tehtävä on tyypillinen kysymys vastaustehtävä. Tavalliseen kysymys- ja vastausjärjestelmään verrattuna sen on annettava vastaus esitettyyn tekstiin. Ongelman ydin on itse asiassa lukemisen ymmärtäminen. Tyypillisesti jokaiselle tekstille on useita kysymyksiä, jotka vastaavat sitä. Ja jokaiselle kysymykselle on kaksi ehdokasta vastauksia (ja vain yksi niistä on oikea). Ongelman ratkaisemiseksi käytetään yleensä konvolutionaalisia neuroverkkoja (CNN) ja toistuvia hermoverkkoja (RNN) tai niiden parannettuja malleja (kuten pitkäkestoista lyhytaikaista muistia (LSTM)). Tässä työssä esitetään huomiopohjainen CNN-LSTM-malli tähän tehtävään. Lisäämällä huomiomekanismin ja yhdistämällä kaksi mallia tämä kokeellinen tulos on merkittävästi parantunut.', 'et': 'See ühisülesanne on tüüpiline küsimustele vastamise ülesanne. Võrreldes tavapärase küsimuste ja vastuste süsteemiga peab ta andma küsimusele vastuse esitatud teksti alusel. Probleemi olemus on tegelikult lugemise arusaamine. Tavaliselt on iga sellele vastava teksti kohta mitu küsimust. Ja iga küsimuse kohta on kaks kandidaadi vastust (ja ainult üks neist on õige). Selle probleemi lahendamiseks kasutatakse tavaliselt konvolutsioonilisi neurovõrke (CNN) ja korduvat neurovõrku (RNN) või nende täiustatud mudeleid (nt pikaajaline lühiajaline mälu (LSTM)). Käesolevas töös pakutakse välja tähelepanupõhine CNN-LSTM mudel selle ülesande jaoks. Tähelepanumehhanismi lisamisega ja kahe mudeli kombineerimisega on seda katsetulemust oluliselt parandatud.', 'jv': 'task Kumpulan karo sistem sing Normal suanung lan mbubati, kudu nyimpen responsi kanggo mandeg seneng wis dianggap kanggo teks sing bisa dianggap Laptop" and "Desktop Kadalaman, sing sampeyan akeh suaung kanggo saben teks sing myune karo Karo saben cejang, sing wis ana mbuluk durung (lan saben sing wis dipun). Ngubah menehi perusahaan iki, dadi akèh dumateng kuwi nggunakake sistem konvolutasi netwisan (MTN) lan nganggo akeh sistem netwisan (DNN) obah akeh model sing apik (koyo ibut terus akeh dumateng memora (LTT M). Nang pemilih iki, modèl sing sampeyan nggawe MT-SLT M kuwi nggawe barang iki. Nambah nambah mekanim sing beraksi lan ngsambah model durung, dadi sing beraksi banter.', 'sk': 'To opravilo v skupni rabi je tipično opravilo odgovarjanja na vprašanja. V primerjavi z običajnim sistemom vprašanj in odgovorov mora dati odgovor na vprašanje na podlagi predloženega besedila. Bistvo problema je dejansko bralno razumevanje. Običajno je za vsako besedilo več vprašanj, ki ustrezajo njemu. In za vsako vprašanje obstajata dva kandidatna odgovora (in samo eden od njih je pravilen). Za rešitev tega problema je običajni pristop uporabe konvolucijskih nevronskih omrežij (CNN) in ponavljajočih se nevronskih omrežij (RNN) ali njihovih izboljšanih modelov (kot je dolgoročni kratkoročni pomnilnik (LSTM)). V prispevku je za to nalogo predlagan model CNN-LSTM, ki temelji na pozornosti. Z dodajanjem mehanizma pozornosti in kombinacijo obeh modelov je bil ta poskusni rezultat bistveno izboljšan.', 'ha': "Wannan aikin da aka raba shi yana wani tambayi mai daidaita. @ action: button The essence of the problem is actually reading comprehension.  Kila'a, akwai wasu maswali masu yawa ga duk matsayin da ke daidai da shi. Ga kõwane mutum akwai majiɓinta biyu. To, da ya raba wa wannan muammãni, aikin ɗabi'a ne ya yi amfani da wagon neural na'ura (CNN) da kuma a sake a lokacin tara (RNN) ko kuma misoden da suka gyãra (kamar misali lokacin-mudan daidai (LTRM). Ga wannan takardan, an buƙata wata misali mai bincike wa CNN-LSSM wa wannan aikin. Ga ku ƙara wani aikin muhimmanci da ya haɗi misalin biyu, an kyautata matsalar wannan jarrabi.", 'he': 'המשימה המשותפת הזו היא משימה טיפוסית לענות על שאלות. בהשוואה למערכת השאלות והתשובות הנורמלית, היא צריכה לתת את התשובה לשאלה מבוססת על הטקסט שנתן. העיקר של הבעיה הוא למעשה לקרוא הבנה. בדרך כלל, יש כמה שאלות לכל טקסט שמתאימות לזה. וכל שאלה, יש שתי תשובות מועמדות (ורק אחת מהן נכונה). כדי לפתור את הבעיה הזאת, הגישה הרגילה היא להשתמש ברשתות עצביות משתנות (CNN) ורשת עצבית משתנה (RNN) או בדוגמנים השתפרים שלהם (כמו זיכרון ארוך לטווח קצר (LSTM)). In this paper, an attention-based CNN-LSTM model is proposed for this task.  על ידי להוסיף מנגנון תשומת לב ולשילוב את שני הדוגמנים, התוצאה הניסיונית הזו השתפרה באופן משמעותי.', 'bo': 'མཉམ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་འདི་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་གིས་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་རིམ་ཞིག སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་རྩོམ་པ་གྱི་མ་ལག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་དགོས་པ དཀའ་ངལ་གྱི་རྩ་བའི་དོན་དག་དེ་དངོས་ཡོད་གནས་ཚུལ་ལྟ་ཀློག་བཞིན་པ་དེ་རེད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན། ཡི་གེས་ཡོངས་རེ་རེའི་ནང་དུ་འདྲི་བ་མང་པོ་ཡོད། འདྲི་ཚིག་རེ་རེར་ལ། ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་གཉིས་ཡོད། To solve this problem, the usual approach is to use convolutional neural networks (CNN) and recurrent neural network (RNN) or their improved models (such as long short-term memory (LSTM)). ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གནད་དོན་གཞི་རྟེན་པའི་CNN-LSTM་དབྱིབས་འདི་ལ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྲོ་བ་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ལས། བརྟག་དཔེ་གཞི་འདི་གི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མང་ཤོས་ཏེ་འགྱུར་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Jiangnan at SemEval-2018 Task 11 : Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'ar': 'Jiangnan في SemEval-2018 المهمة 11: الشبكة العصبية العميقة مع طريقة الانتباه لمهمة فهم الآلة', 'pt': 'Jiangnan no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 11: Rede Neural Profunda com Método de Atenção para Tarefa de Compreensão da Máquina', 'fr': "Jiangnan au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 11\xa0: Réseau neuronal profond avec méthode d'attention pour la tâche de compréhension de la machine", 'es': 'Jiangnan en SemEval-2018 Tarea 11: Red neuronal profunda con método de atención para la tarea de comprensión de máquinas', 'ja': 'SEMEval -2018の江南タスク11 ：機械理解タスクのための注意喚起メソッドを備えた深層ニューラルネットワーク', 'zh': '江南SemEval-2018务11:机器知深神经网络与注意之法', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 11 पर Jiangnan: मशीन समझ कार्य के लिए ध्यान विधि के साथ गहरी तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Jiangnan на SemEval-2018 Задача 11: Глубокая нейронная сеть с методом внимания для задачи машинного понимания', 'ga': 'Jiangnan ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Líonra Neural Deep le Modh Airde le haghaidh Tasc Tuisceana Meaisín', 'ka': 'Jiangnan at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'el': 'Καθήκον 11: Βαθύ Νευρικό Δίκτυο με Μέθοδο Προσοχής για την Εργασία Κατανόησης Μηχανών', 'it': 'Jiangnan al SemEval-2018 Task 11: Rete neurale profonda con metodo di attenzione per il compito di comprensione della macchina', 'lt': 'Jiangnan 2010 m. puslapyje 11 užduotis: gilus neurologinis tinklas, kuriame dėmesys skiriamas mašinų supratimo užduotims atlikti', 'kk': 'Jiangnan at semiEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'mk': 'Jiangnan на SemEval-2018 задача 11: Длабока неурална мрежа со внимание Метод за задача за машинско разбирање', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 11: മെഷീന്\u200d പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധയോടെ ആഴത്തിലുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലം', 'ms': 'Jiangnan di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Rangkaian Neural Dalam Dengan Kaedah Perhatian untuk Tugas Pemahaman Mesin', 'mt': 'Jiangnan f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 11: Netwerk Newrali Profond b’Metodu ta’ Attenzjoni għal Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju', 'mn': 'Jiangnan at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'no': 'Jiangnan at semiEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'hu': 'Jiangnan a SemEval-2018 11. feladat: Mélyidegi hálózat figyelemmel kísérő módszerrel a gépek megértésére', 'pl': 'Jiangnan w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 11: Głęboka sieć neuronowa z metodą uwagi na zadanie zrozumienia maszyny', 'sr': 'Jiangnan na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: duboka neuronska mreža sa metodom pažnje za zadatak kompresije mašine', 'ro': 'Jiangnan la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 11: Rețeaua Neurală profundă cu metodă de atenție pentru sarcina de înțelegere a mașinilor', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Jiangnan at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'sv': 'Jiangnan på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 11: Djupt neuralt nätverk med uppmärksamhetsmetod för maskinförståelse uppgift', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் ஜியாங்னான்', 'ur': 'جنگنان سیم اول-2018 ٹاکس 11: عمیق نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک مشین کمپرینس ٹاکس کے لئے اچھی طریقہ کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Vazifani SemEval- 2018 yilda Jiangnan 11: Mashine kompyuterning vazifalari uchun Deep Neural Network with Attention Method', 'vi': 'Giang Nam tại SemEvl-tê 8 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Chú ý Method for Machine Compention Task', 'bg': 'Задача 11: Дълбока неврална мрежа с метод на внимание за задача за разбиране на машината', 'hr': 'Jiangnan na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: duboka neurona mreža s metodom pažnje za zadatak komprencije strojeva', 'da': 'Jiangnan på SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Dybt neuralt netværk med opmærksomhedsmetode til maskinforståelsesopgave', 'nl': 'Jiangnan bij SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Diep Neuraal Netwerk met Aandacht Methode voor Machine Comprehensie Taak', 'de': 'Jiangnan bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 11: Tiefen neuronales Netzwerk mit Aufmerksamkeitsmethode f羹r Maschinenverst瓣ndnisaufgabe', 'id': 'Jiangnan di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Jaringan Neural Dalam Dengan Metode Perhatian untuk Tugas Pemahaman Mesin', 'ko': '강남대학교SemEval-18퀘스트11:기계이해퀘스트의 깊이신경망 주의방법', 'fa': 'Jiangnan at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task 11:', 'sw': 'Jiangnan kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 11: Mtandao wa Ndani ya Kiurali na Utawala wa Tamko wa Kupima Mifumo ya Mashiniki', 'sq': 'Jiangnan at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'tr': 'Jiangnan at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ስራ 11:Deep Neural Network with Attention method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'hy': 'Ջինգնանը, 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ" 11-րդ հանձնարարում. խորը նյարդային ցանց, ուշադրություն դարձնելով մեքենայի ընկալումների հանձնարարության մեթոդը', 'az': 'Jiangnan at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'bs': 'Jiangnan na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: duboka neuronska mreža sa metodom pažnje za zadatak kompresije mašine', 'et': 'Jiangnan SemEval-2018 ülesandel 11: sügav neurovõrk tähelepanu meetodiga masina mõistmise ülesandeks', 'bn': '১১ টি কাজে সেমEval-2018-এ জিয়াংন: মেশিন সম্পূর্ণ কাজের জন্য মনোযোগ দিয়ে গভীর নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'ca': 'Jiangnan a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'fi': 'Jiangnan SemEval-2018 TehtĂ¤vĂ¤ 11: SyvĂ¤ hermoverkko tarkkaavaisuusmenetelmĂ¤llĂ¤ koneen ymmĂ¤rtĂ¤miseen', 'cs': 'Jiangnan na SemEval-2018 Úkol 11: Hluboká neuronová síť s metodou pozornosti pro úkol porozumění strojů', 'jv': 'Jiangnan at semebal-2008 task 11: deep Neral Network with Attention Method for Masine Comprerension task', 'he': 'Jiangnan ב SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'bo': 'Jiangnan at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Deep Neural Network with Attention Method for Machine Comprehension Task', 'sk': 'Jiangnan na SemEval-2018 naloga 11: Globoko živčno omrežje z metodo pozornosti za nalogo razumevanja strojev', 'ha': 'Jiangnan at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 11: Depth Neural Networks with Attitory Method for Machine Comprehension job'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our submission for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) shared task 11 Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). We use a deep neural network model to choose the correct answer from the candidate answers pair when the document and question are given. The interactions between document, question and answers are modeled by attention mechanism and a variety of manual features are used to improve model performance. We also use CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) as an external source of knowledge which is not mentioned in the document. As a result, our system achieves 80.91 % accuracy on the test data, which is on the third place of the leaderboard.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة تقديمنا لورشة العمل الدولية حول التقييم الدلالي (SemEval-2018) المهمة المشتركة 11 - فهم الآلة باستخدام المعرفة المشاع (Ostermann et al.، 2018b). نستخدم نموذج شبكة عصبية عميقة لاختيار الإجابة الصحيحة من زوج الإجابات المرشح عند تقديم المستند والسؤال. تم تصميم التفاعلات بين المستند والسؤال والإجابات بواسطة آلية الانتباه ويتم استخدام مجموعة متنوعة من الميزات اليدوية لتحسين أداء النموذج. نستخدم أيضًا CoVe (McCann et al. ، 2017) كمصدر خارجي للمعرفة لم يرد ذكره في المستند. نتيجة لذلك ، يحقق نظامنا دقة تصل إلى 80.91٪ على بيانات الاختبار ، والتي تحتل المرتبة الثالثة في قائمة المتصدرين.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre soumission pour la tâche partagée 11 de l'Atelier international sur l'évaluation sémantique (SemEval-2018) — Compréhension automatique à l'aide des connaissances du sens commun (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Nous utilisons un modèle de réseau neuronal profond pour choisir la bonne réponse dans la paire de réponses candidates lorsque le document et la question sont donnés. Les interactions entre le document, la question et les réponses sont modélisées par le mécanisme d'attention et diverses fonctions manuelles sont utilisées pour améliorer les performances du modèle. Nous utilisons également CoVE (McCann et al., 2017) comme source externe de connaissances qui n'est pas mentionnée dans le document. En conséquence, notre système atteint une précision de 80,91\xa0% sur les données de test, ce qui se situe à la troisième place du classement.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestra presentación para la tarea compartida 11 del Taller Internacional sobre Evaluación Semántica (SemEval-2018): Comprensión de máquinas mediante el conocimiento de sentido común (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Utilizamos un modelo de red neuronal profunda para elegir la respuesta correcta del par de respuestas candidatas cuando se dan el documento y la pregunta. Las interacciones entre el documento, la pregunta y las respuestas se modelan mediante el mecanismo de atención y se utilizan una variedad de funciones manuales para mejorar el rendimiento del modelo. También utilizamos CoVE (McCann et al., 2017) como fuente externa de conocimiento que no se menciona en el documento. Como resultado, nuestro sistema logra una precisión del 80,91% en los datos de las pruebas, que se encuentran en el tercer lugar de la clasificación.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa submissão para o Workshop Internacional de Avaliação Semântica (SemEval-2018) tarefa compartilhada 11 – Compreensão de Máquina usando Conhecimento Comum (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Usamos um modelo de rede neural profunda para escolher a resposta correta do par de respostas candidatas quando o documento e a pergunta são fornecidos. As interações entre documento, pergunta e respostas são modeladas pelo mecanismo de atenção e uma variedade de recursos manuais são usados para melhorar o desempenho do modelo. Também usamos o CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) como fonte externa de conhecimento que não é mencionada no documento. Como resultado, nosso sistema atinge 80,91% de precisão nos dados de teste, que está em terceiro lugar na tabela de classificação.', 'ja': 'この論文では、セマンティック評価国際ワークショップ（ SemEval -2018 ）の共有タスク11 -コモンセンスナレッジを使用した機械理解（ Ostermann et al., 2018 b ）への提出について説明します。私たちは深層ニューラルネットワークモデルを使用して、文書と質問が与えられたときに候補者の答えペアから正しい答えを選択します。文書、質問、回答間の相互作用は、注意メカニズムによってモデル化され、モデルのパフォーマンスを向上させるためにさまざまな手動機能が使用されます。また、CoVe （ McCann et al., 2017 ）は、文書に記載されていない外部の知識源としても使用されています。その結果、当社のシステムは、ランキングの3位に位置するテストデータに対して80.91 ％の精度を実現します。', 'zh': '本文述国际语义评估研讨会(SemEval-2018)提交同务11 - 用常识机器解(Ostermann等,2018b)。 当与文档问,以深度神经网络从候选对中择其正对。 文档、问、对、对之交,以意机建模,而用诸手动之功以崇其能。 用CoVe(McCann等,2017)为文档中未外知。 是以统成于测试数据80.91%之准确率,第三于排行榜。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наше представление на Международный семинар по семантической оценке (SemEval-2018) общей задачи 11 - Понимание машины с использованием знаний общего смысла (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Мы используем модель глубокой нейронной сети, чтобы выбрать правильный ответ из пары ответов-кандидатов, когда документ и вопрос даны. Взаимодействие между документом, вопросом и ответами моделируется механизмом внимания, и для повышения эффективности модели используются различные ручные функции. Мы также используем CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) в качестве внешнего источника знаний, который не упоминается в документе. В итоге наша система достигает 80,91% точности по тестовым данным, которая находится на третьем месте таблицы лидеров.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर सिमेंटिक मूल्यांकन (SemEval-2018) साझा कार्य 11 पर अंतर्राष्ट्रीय कार्यशाला के लिए हमारे प्रस्तुतीकरण का वर्णन करता है - कॉमनसेंस नॉलेज (Ostermann et al., 2018b) का उपयोग करके मशीन समझ। हम दस्तावेज़ और प्रश्न दिए जाने पर उम्मीदवार उत्तर जोड़ी से सही उत्तर चुनने के लिए एक गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं। दस्तावेज़, प्रश्न और उत्तरों के बीच इंटरैक्शन ध्यान तंत्र द्वारा मॉडलिंग की जाती है और मॉडल प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए विभिन्न प्रकार की मैनुअल सुविधाओं का उपयोग किया जाता है। हम CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) का उपयोग ज्ञान के बाहरी स्रोत के रूप में भी करते हैं जिसका दस्तावेज़ में उल्लेख नहीं किया गया है। नतीजतन, हमारा सिस्टम परीक्षण डेटा पर 80.91% सटीकता प्राप्त करता है, जो लीडरबोर्ड के तीसरे स्थान पर है।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár n-aighneacht don Cheardlann Idirnáisiúnta ar Mheastóireacht Shéimeantach (SemEval-2018) tasc comhroinnte 11 – Tuiscint Meaisíní ag baint úsáide as Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Bainimid úsáid as samhail líonra néar domhain chun an freagra ceart a roghnú as na freagraí iarrthóra péire nuair a thugtar an doiciméad agus an cheist. Múnlaítear na hidirghníomhaíochtaí idir doiciméad, ceist agus freagraí trí mheicníocht aird agus úsáidtear éagsúlacht de ghnéithe láimhe chun feidhmíocht na samhla a fheabhsú. Bainimid úsáid freisin as CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) mar fhoinse sheachtrach eolais nach bhfuil luaite sa doiciméad. Mar thoradh air sin, baineann ár gcóras cruinneas 80.91% amach ar na sonraí tástála, atá ar an tríú háit den chlár ceannairí.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a Nemzetközi Szemantikai Értékelési Workshop (SemEval-2018) megosztott feladatának 11- Gépi Megértés Commonsense Knowledge használatával (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Mély neurális hálózati modellt használunk, hogy kiválasszuk a helyes választ a jelölt válaszok párjából a dokumentum és a kérdés megadásakor. A dokumentum, a kérdés és a válaszok közötti interakciókat figyelem mechanizmus modellezi, és a modell teljesítményének javítására számos manuális funkciót használnak. A CoVe-t (McCann et al., 2017) a dokumentumban nem említett külső tudásforrásként is használjuk. Ennek eredményeképpen rendszerünk 80,91%-os pontosságot ér el a tesztadatok tekintetében, ami a ranglistán a harmadik helyen van.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra presentazione per il Workshop internazionale sulla valutazione semantica (SemEval-2018) compito condiviso 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Usiamo un modello di rete neurale profonda per scegliere la risposta corretta dalla coppia di risposte candidate quando il documento e la domanda sono forniti. Le interazioni tra documento, domanda e risposte sono modellate da meccanismi di attenzione e una varietà di funzioni manuali sono utilizzate per migliorare le prestazioni del modello. Utilizziamo anche CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) come fonte esterna di conoscenza che non è menzionata nel documento. Di conseguenza, il nostro sistema raggiunge l'80,91% di accuratezza sui dati di test, che si trova al terzo posto della classifica.", 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის გამოსახულება ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო განსაზღვრებისთვის (SemEval-2018) გაყოფილი სამუშაო 11- მაქინის კომპრენცია გამოყენებული Commonsense Knowledge ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელს, როდესაც კონდიდენტის პასუხისგან მარტივი პასუხისთვის, როდესაც დოკუმენტი და კითხვა მიიღ დოკუმენტი, კითხვა და პასუხების შორის ინტერქექციები მოდელურია მონიშნული მექანიზმით და მსგავსი ხელსაწყოთა ფუნქციები გამოყენებულია მოდელური კ ჩვენ ასევე გამოყენებთ CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) როგორც გარეშე მეცნიერების გამოსახულება, რომელიც დოკუმენტში არ ამბობს. შემდეგ ჩვენი სისტემა 80,91% წარმოიდგინდება ტესტის მონაცემებზე, რომელიც მესამე ადგილზე ლიდერბორდის სამუშაო ადგილში.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma mūsų paraiška Tarptautiniam seminarui dėl seminio vertinimo (SemEval-2018) atlikti bendrą užduotį 11 – Komprehension Machine using Common Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Mes naudojame gilaus nervinio tinklo model į, kad pasirinktume teisingą atsakymą iš kandidato atsakymų poros, kai pateikiamas dokumentas ir klausimas. Dokumentų, klausimų ir atsakymų sąveika modeliuojama pagal dėmesio mechanizmą, o modelio veiksmingumui gerinti naudojamos įvairios rankinės savybės. Mes taip pat naudojame CoVe (McCann et al., 2017 m.) kaip išorinį žinių šaltinį, kuris šiame dokumente neminimas. Dėl to mūsų sistema užtikrina 80,91 % tikslumą bandymų duomenise, kurie yra trečioje pirmosios lentos vietoje.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің халықаралық семантикалық оқу жұмысының (SemEval-2018) 11- Машина құрылымызды Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b) арқылы ортақ тапсырманы ортақтастыру үшін тапсырмамызды анықтайды. Құжат мен сұрақ берілген кезде, кандидаттың жауаптарынан дұрыс жауапты таңдау үшін терең неврал желі үлгісін қолданамыз. Құжат, сұрақ және жауаптар арасындағы әрқашамдылықтары өзгерту механизмі арқылы модельді, және үлгісін жақсарту үшін әртүрлі қолмен қасиеттер қолданылады. Сонымен қатар, құжатта айтылмаған сыртқы білім көзі ретінде CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) қолданамыз. Біздің жүйеміз сынақтар мәліметінде 80,91% дұрыс жеткізеді. Бұл жердің үшінші жерінде.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашето поднесување за Меѓународниот работилник за семантичка евалуација (SemEval-2018) заедничка задача 11- Машинско разбирање со користење на заедничко знаење (Ostermann et al., 2018b). We use a deep neural network model to choose the correct answer from the candidate answers pair when the document and question are given.  Интеракциите помеѓу документот, прашањата и одговорите се моделирани со механизмот на внимание и се користат различни рачни карактеристики за подобрување на резултатите на моделот. Ние исто така користиме CoVe (McCann и други, 2017) како надворешен извор на знаење кој не е споменет во документот. As a result, our system achieves 80.91% accuracy on the test data, which is on the third place of the leaderboard.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan penghantaran kami untuk Pekerjaan antarabangsa untuk Evaluasi Semantik (SemEval-2018) tugas berkongsi 11- Pemahaman Mesin menggunakan Pengetahuan Komuni (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Kami menggunakan model rangkaian saraf dalam untuk memilih jawapan yang betul dari pasangan jawapan calon apabila dokumen dan soalan diberikan. Interaksi antara dokumen, soalan dan jawapan dipodelkan oleh mekanisme perhatian dan pelbagai ciri manual digunakan untuk meningkatkan prestasi model. Kami juga menggunakan CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) sebagai sumber pengetahuan luaran yang tidak disebut dalam dokumen. Sebagai hasilnya, sistem kita mencapai ketepatan 80.91% pada data ujian, yang berada di tempat ketiga papan utama.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സന്ദേശം വിവരിക്കുന്നത് സെമ്മാന്റിക് വിവേചനയുടെ (സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d-2018) വിഭാഗിക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലി 11- മെഷീന്\u200d പരിശോധനത്തിന്\u200d രേഖയും ചോദ്യം നല്\u200dകപ്പെടുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിയുടെ ഉത്തരം ശരിയായി തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ രേഖ, ചോദ്യം, മറുപടികള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള തമ്മിലുള്ള ഇടപാടുകള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കുന്നു. മാതൃകയുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കോവെ (മാക്ക്ക്കാന്\u200d എറ്റ് അല്\u200d 2017) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവ് സ്രോതസ്സായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. രേഖ അതിന്റെ ഫലമായി, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 80.91% പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണത്തില്\u200d എത്തുന്നതാണ്. അത് നേതാവിന്റെ മൂ', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την υποβολή μας για το Διεθνές Εργαστήριο Σημαντικής Αξιολόγησης (Κοινή εργασία 11-Κατανόηση Μηχανών με χρήση της Κοινής Γνώσης (κ.α., 2018β). Χρησιμοποιούμε ένα μοντέλο βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων για να επιλέξουμε τη σωστή απάντηση από το ζευγάρι υποψήφιων απαντήσεων όταν δίνονται το έγγραφο και η ερώτηση. Οι αλληλεπιδράσεις μεταξύ εγγράφου, ερώτησης και απαντήσεων μοντελούνται με μηχανισμό προσοχής και μια ποικιλία χειροκίνητων χαρακτηριστικών χρησιμοποιούνται για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης του μοντέλου. Χρησιμοποιούμε επίσης το ως εξωτερική πηγή γνώσης που δεν αναφέρεται στο έγγραφο. Ως αποτέλεσμα, το σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 80.91% στα δεδομένα δοκιμής, τα οποία βρίσκονται στην τρίτη θέση του πίνακα κατάταξης.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje naszą zgłoszenie do Międzynarodowego Warsztatu Oceny Semantycznej (SemEval-2018) wspólnego zadania 11-Zrozumienie maszyn z wykorzystaniem wiedzy powszechnej (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Używamy modelu głębokiej sieci neuronowej, aby wybrać właściwą odpowiedź z pary odpowiedzi kandydatów, gdy dokument i pytanie są podane. Interakcje między dokumentem, pytaniem i odpowiedziami są modelowane przez mechanizm uwagi, a różne funkcje ręczne są wykorzystywane do poprawy wydajności modelu. Wykorzystujemy również CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) jako zewnętrzne źródło wiedzy, które nie jest wymienione w dokumencie. Dzięki temu nasz system osiąga 80,91% dokładność danych testowych, która znajduje się na trzecim miejscu klasyfikacji.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний олон улсын Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) ажил 11-Машины Төрөвдүүлэлтийг Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b) ашиглан харуулж байна. Бид баримт болон асуулт өгсөн үед зөв хариултыг сонгохын тулд гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварыг ашигладаг. Документ, асуулт болон хариултын хоорондын харилцаа нь анхаарлын механизмаар загвар өгдөг. Загварын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд олон гар чадвар ашигладаг. Бид мөн CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) баримт дурдаггүй гадаад мэдлэгийн эх үүсвэр болгон ашиглаж байна. Үүний үр дүнд бидний систем шалгалтын өгөгдлийн тодорхойлолт 80.91%-ыг гаргадаг. Энэ нь манлайлагч буудалдын 3 дахь орон.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vårt submisjon for den internasjonale arbeidsområdet på semantiske evaluering (SemEval-2018) delt oppgåve 11- Machine Comprehension med Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Vi bruker ein dyp neuralnettverksmodell for å velja korrekte svar frå kandidatsvaret for par når dokumentet og spørsmålet vert oppgjeven. Interaksjonane mellom dokumentet, spørsmål og svar er modelte av oppmerksmekanismen og brukar mange manuelle funksjonar for å forbetra modellen. Vi bruker også CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) som eit ekstern kjelde for kunnskap som ikkje er gjeven i dokumentet. I resultatet oppnår systemet vårt 80,91% nøyaktighet på test data, som er på den tredje plassen av lederbordet.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie prezentarea noastră pentru Workshop-ul Internațional de Evaluare Semantică (SemEval-2018) sarcina partajată 11- Înțelegerea mașinilor utilizând cunoștințele Commonsense (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Folosim un model de rețea neuronală profundă pentru a alege răspunsul corect din perechea de răspunsuri candidate atunci când documentul și întrebarea sunt date. Interacțiunile dintre document, întrebare și răspunsuri sunt modelate de mecanismul de atenție și o varietate de caracteristici manuale sunt utilizate pentru a îmbunătăți performanța modelului. De asemenea, folosim CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) ca sursă externă de cunoștințe care nu este menționată în document. Ca rezultat, sistemul nostru obține o acuratețe de 80,91% pe datele de testare, care se află pe locul trei în clasament.', 'so': "Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran muuqashada warqaddayada caalamiga ah ee ku saabsan kaartaynta SemEval-2018 (SemEval-2018) oo lagu qaybiyey shaqada 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsance Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Waxaynu isticmaalnaa tilmaamo dheer oo cawinaad ah si aan uga dooranno jawaabta saxda ah marka la siiyo dukumentiga iyo su'aalaha. Xiriirka u dhexeeya dukumenti, su'aalaha iyo jawaabaha waxaa lagu sameynayaa meymisyo daryeel ah iyo qalab kala duduwan oo dhaqan ah si loo hago sameynta tusaale ahaan. Sidoo kale waxaynu u isticmaalnaa CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) taas oo ah taariikhda aqoonta dibadda ah oo aan lagu sheegin dukumentiga. Sababtaas darteed nidaamkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa 80.91 boqolkiiba si saxda ah oo ku saabsan macluumaadka imtixaanka, kaasoo ku yaala meeshii saddexaad ee hogaamiyaha.", 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjoni tagħna għall-Workshop Internazzjonali dwar l-Evalwazzjoni Semantika (SemEval-2018) kompitu kondiviż 11- Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju bl-użu tal-Għarfien Komuni (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Aħna nużaw mudell ta’ netwerk newrali profond biex nagħżlu t-tweġiba korretta mill-pari ta’ tweġibiet kandidati meta jingħata d-dokument u l-mistoqsija. L-interazzjonijiet bejn id-dokument, il-mistoqsijiet u t-tweġibiet huma mmudellati permezz ta’ mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni u jintużaw varjetà ta’ karatteristiċi manwali biex itejbu l-prestazzjoni tal-mudell. Aħna nużaw ukoll CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) bħala sors estern ta’ għarfien li mhuwiex imsemmi fid-dokument. B’riżultat ta’ dan, is-sistema tagħna tikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 80,91 % fuq id-dejta tat-test, li tinsab fit-tielet post tat-tabella ewlenija.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke za Međunarodno radionico o semantičkoj evaluaciji (SemEval-2018) zajednièki zadatak 11-Mašinska komprehenzija koristeći znanje Commonsense (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Koristimo model duboke neuralne mreže kako bi izabrali ispravan odgovor od kandidata koji odgovara na par kada se dato dokument i pitanje. Interakcije između dokumenta, pitanja i odgovora modeliraju mehanizam pažnje i razne rukovne funkcije koriste se za poboljšanje model a. Takođe koristimo Cove (McCann et al., 2017) kao spoljni izvor znanja koji se ne spominje u dokumentu. Kao rezultat toga, naš sistem postiže tačnost od 80,91% na testnim podacima, koja je na trećem mestu vodeće ploče.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ අන්තර්ජාත්\u200dරික වැඩසටහන් සඳහා සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය (සෙම්වල්-2018) කාර්ය 11- මැෂින් සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සඳහා ස අපි ගොඩක් න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයේ මොඩේලයක් භාවිතා කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200d ලිපිනය, ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ ප්\u200dරතිච්චි අතර සම්බන්ධතාවය අතර අවධානය සහ අවධානය පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා සහ අපි සමහරවිට Cove (McCann et al., 2017) භාවිතා කරනවා දන්නේ නැති ප්\u200dරදේශයක් වගේ. පරීක්ෂණයෙන්, අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණයේ තුන්වෙනි තැනයේ පරීක්ෂණයේ දත්තේ 80.91% සැකසුම් වෙනවා.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt bidrag till den internationella workshopen om semantisk utvärdering (SemEval-2018) delade uppgiften 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Vi använder en djup neural nätverksmodell för att välja rätt svar från kandidatens svarspar när dokument och fråga ges. Samspelet mellan dokument, fråga och svar modelleras av uppmärksamhetsmekanism och en mängd olika manuella funktioner används för att förbättra modellens prestanda. Vi använder också CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) som en extern kunskapskälla som inte nämns i dokumentet. Som ett resultat uppnår vårt system 80,91% noggrannhet på testdata, vilket ligger på tredje plats i rankningslistan.', 'ur': 'This paper describes our submission for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) shared task 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). ہم ایک عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کاندینٹ کے جواب دو جواب سے درست جواب انتخاب کریں جب سند اور سوال دی جاتی ہے۔ سند، سوال اور جواب کے درمیان تعاملات کی مدل کی جاتی ہیں اور ایک مختلف دستی ویژگی کو مدل کی عملکرد کے ساتھ استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. ہم نے بھی CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) کو ایک خارج علم کے منبع کے طور پر استعمال کیا ہے جو دکھانے میں ذکر نہیں کیا جاتا۔ نتیجہ سے، ہماری سیستم نے آزمائش ڈیٹوں پر 80.91% دقیق پہنچائی ہے، جو لیدربورد کی تیسری جگہ پر ہے.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் செம்மாண்டிக் evaluation (SemEval-2018) பகிர்ந்த பணியில் 11- இயந்திரம் மீட்டு தொகுப்பு அறிவை பயன்படுத்தி ஒஸ்டர்மான் மற்றும் அல், 2018b க்கு எங்கள ஆவணம் மற்றும் கேள்வி கொடுக்கப்படும்போது தேர்ந்தெடுக்க ஒரு ஆழமான புதிய பிணைய மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். ஆவணம், கேள்வி மற்றும் விடைகளுக்கிடையே இடையே உள்ள இடைவெளிப்பாடு மேலும் நாம் கோவை (McCann et al., 2017) ஒரு வெளி அறிவு மூலமாக பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். அது ஆவணத்தில் குறிப்பிடப்படாது. முடிவுக்கு, எங்கள் கணினி 80.91% சரியான தரவை பெறுகிறது, அது தலைவரின் மூன்றாவது இடத்தில் உள்ளது.', 'uz': 'Bu sahifa SemEval-2018 (SemEval-2018) bilan birlashtirilgan vazifani 11- Mashine kompyuterni (Ostermann et al., 2018b) bilan birlashtirilgan vazifani anglatadi. Hujjat va savol berilganda, kandida to ʻgʻri javob berish uchun juda yaxshi tarmoq modelini ishlatimiz. Name Шунингдек, биз ҳужжатда номланган маълумот асосий сифатдан фойдаланамиз. Bu natijada, bizning tizimmiz sinov maʼlumotlariga 80.91% tizimni aniqlaydi, bu boshqaruvchi uchinchi joyida.', 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả sự đệ trình của chúng ta cho "The International Workshop in Semantic evasion (SemEvl-thẩm 8) lần chia sẻ nhiệm vụ 11- Machine Compention using Commonsy knowledge (Ostermann et al., thậm chí bây giờ). Chúng tôi dùng một mô hình mạng thần kinh sâu để chọn câu trả lời đúng từ cặp câu trả lời ứng cử viên khi tài liệu và câu hỏi được đưa ra. Sự tương tác giữa tài liệu, câu hỏi và câu trả lời được mô hình dựa trên cơ quan chú ý, và rất nhiều tính năng hướng dẫn sử dụng để nâng cao khả năng mô hình. Chúng tôi cũng dùng CoVe (McCann et al., 2007) làm nguồn hiểu biết bên ngoài mà không có trong tài liệu. Kết quả là hệ thống của chúng ta đạt đến độ chính xác 801 của dữ liệu thử nghiệm, nằm ở vị trí thứ ba của bảng lái.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашето представяне за споделената задача 11- Разбиране на машините с помощта на общосъобразно знание (Остерман и др., 2018б). Използваме модел на дълбока невронна мрежа, за да изберем правилния отговор от двойката отговори на кандидатите, когато документът и въпросът са дадени. Взаимодействието между документ, въпрос и отговори се моделира чрез механизъм за внимание и се използват различни ръчни функции за подобряване на производителността на модела. Също така използваме като външен източник на знания, които не са споменати в документа. В резултат на това нашата система постига 80.91% точност на данните от теста, което е на трето място в класацията.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores indsendelse til den internationale workshop om semantisk evaluering (SemEval-2018) delte opgave 11- Maskinforståelse ved hjælp af Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Vi bruger en dyb neural netværksmodel til at vælge det korrekte svar fra kandidatens svar par, når dokumentet og spørgsmålet gives. Samspillet mellem dokument, spørgsmål og svar modelleres af opmærksomhedsmekanisme, og en række manuelle funktioner bruges til at forbedre modellens ydeevne. Vi bruger også CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) som en ekstern kilde til viden, som ikke er nævnt i dokumentet. Som følge heraf opnår vores system 80,91% nøjagtighed på testdata, som er på tredjepladsen i ranglisten.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke za Međunarodno radionico o semantičkoj procjeni (SemEval-2018) zajednički zadatak 11-strojna komprehenzija koristeći znanje Commonsense (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Koristimo model duboke neuralne mreže kako bi odabrali ispravan odgovor od kandidata koji odgovara na par kada se dato dokument i pitanje. Interakcije između dokumenta, pitanja i odgovora modeliraju mehanizam pažnje i različite rukovne funkcije koriste se za poboljšanje provedbe model a. Također koristimo Cove (McCann et al., 2017) kao vanjski izvor znanja koji se ne spominje u dokumentu. Kao rezultat toga, naš sustav postiže tačnost od 80,91% na testnim podacima, što je na trećem mjestu vodeće ploče.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft onze inzending voor de International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) gedeelde taak 11-Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). We gebruiken een deep neural network model om het juiste antwoord uit het kandidaat antwoordpaar te kiezen wanneer het document en de vraag worden gegeven. De interacties tussen document, vraag en antwoord worden gemodelleerd door aandachtsmechanisme en een verscheidenheid aan handmatige functies worden gebruikt om de prestaties van het model te verbeteren. We gebruiken CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) ook als externe bron van kennis die niet in het document wordt vermeld. Hierdoor bereikt ons systeem 80,91% nauwkeurigheid op de testgegevens, die op de derde plaats van het klassement staat.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 의미 평가 국제 세미나(SemEval-2018)에 제출한 공유 임무 11 - 상식을 사용하는 기계적 이해(Ostermann et al., 2018b)를 기술한다.문서와 문제를 제시할 때, 우리는 심도 신경 네트워크 모델을 사용하여 후보 답안 쌍에서 정답을 선택한다.문서, 문제와 답안 간의 상호작용은 주의 메커니즘을 통해 모형을 만들고 각종 수동 기능을 사용하여 모형의 성능을 향상시킨다.또한 파일에서 언급되지 않은 외부 지식의 출처로 CoVe(McCann et al., 2017)를 사용합니다.따라서 우리 시스템은 테스트 데이터에서 80.91%의 정확도를 기록하여 차트에서 3위를 차지했다.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unsere Einreichung für den International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) Shared Task 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonse Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Wir verwenden ein tiefes neuronales Netzwerk-Modell, um die richtige Antwort aus dem Kandidaten-Antwortpaar auszuwählen, wenn das Dokument und die Frage gegeben werden. Die Interaktionen zwischen Dokument, Frage und Antwort werden durch Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus modelliert und eine Vielzahl von manuellen Funktionen verwendet, um die Modellleistung zu verbessern. Wir nutzen CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) auch als externe Wissensquelle, die im Dokument nicht erwähnt wird. Dadurch erreicht unser System 80,91% Genauigkeit bei den Testdaten, die auf dem dritten Platz der Bestenliste stehen.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تحویل ما برای کارگاه بین المللی در مورد ارزیابی سامانتیک (SemEval-2018) مشترک کار ۱۱- مشترک ماشین با استفاده از دانش Commonsense (Ostermann et al., 2018b) را توصیف می\u200cکند. ما از یک مدل شبکه عصبی عمیق استفاده می کنیم تا پاسخ درست را از دو جواب کاندیدا انتخاب کنیم وقتی سند و سوال داده شود. تعاملات بین سند، سوال و پاسخ\u200cها توسط مکانیسم توجه نموده می\u200cشوند و مختلف ویژه\u200cهای دستی برای بهترین عملکرد مدل استفاده می\u200cشوند. ما همچنین از Cove (McCann et al., 2017) به عنوان منبع خارجی از دانش استفاده می کنیم که در سند ذکر نشده است. در نتیجه، سیستم ما به 80.91 درصد دقیق روی داده های آزمایش رسیده است که در سومین مکان رهبر است.', 'id': 'This paper describes our submission for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) shared task 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b).  Kami menggunakan model jaringan saraf dalam untuk memilih jawaban yang benar dari pasangan jawaban kandidat ketika dokumen dan pertanyaan diberikan. Interaksi antara dokumen, pertanyaan dan jawaban dipodelkan oleh mekanisme perhatian dan berbagai ciri manual digunakan untuk meningkatkan prestasi model. Kami juga menggunakan CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) sebagai sumber pengetahuan luar yang tidak disebutkan dalam dokumen. Sebagai hasilnya, sistem kita mencapai akurasi 80,91% pada data tes, yang berada di tempat ketiga papan pemimpin.', 'sw': 'This paper describes our submission for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) shared task 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b).  Tunatumia mtindo wa kikubwa wa mtandao wa neura kuchagua jibu sahihi kutoka majibu ya wagombea wawili pale ambapo nyaraka na maswali yatapewa. Mapatano kati ya nyaraka, maswali na majibu yanatengenezwa na mfumo wa ufuatiliaji na aina mbalimbali za mikononi yanatumiwa kuboresha utendaji wa mifano. Pia tunatumia CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) kama chanzo cha nje cha ufahamu ambao hautajwa madarakani. Matokeo yake, mfumo wetu unapata asilimia 80.91 kuhakikisha takwimu za jaribio, ambazo ni sehemu ya tatu ya kiongozi.', 'tr': 'This paper describes our submission for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) shared task 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Biz Kandidatyň jogabynyň we soragynyň berilip dogry jogabyny saýlamak üçin derin nural şebeke nusgasyny ulanýarys. Sened, sorag we jogabalar arasyndaky etkileşimler üns meýdançasynda örän görnüşdirilýär we dürli manual özellikleri nusgala etmek üçin ullanýar. Biz hem CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) senede agzalan daşarydaky bilim çeşmesi hökmünde ulanýarys. Sonuçta biziň sistemamyz teste maglumatynda 80,91% dogrylygyny ýetip bilýär. Bu ýoly başlygyň üçünji ýerinde bolýar.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan paraqitjen tonë për Workshop Ndërkombëtar mbi Vlerësimin Semantik (SemEval-2018) detyrën e përbashkët 11- Comprehension Machine duke përdorur njohuritë e përbashkëta (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Ne përdorim një model rrjeti nervor të thellë për të zgjedhur përgjigjen e saktë nga kandidati përgjigjet e çiftit kur jepet dokumenti dhe pyetja. Ndërveprimet midis dokumentit, pyetjeve dhe përgjigjeve modelohen nga mekanizmi i vëmendjes dhe përdoren një shumëllojshmëri karakteristike manuale për të përmirësuar performancën e modelit. Ne përdorim gjithashtu CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) si burim i jashtëm i njohurive që nuk përmendet në dokument. Si rezultat, sistemi ynë arrin 80.91% saktësi në të dhënat e testit, e cila është në vendin e tretë të bordit kryesor.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons onderskrywing vir die internasionale werkshop op Semantiese Evaluering (SemEval-2018) gedeel taak 11- Masjien Verspreiding gebruik Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Ons gebruik 'n diep neuralnetwerk model om die korrekte antwoord te kies van die kandidate antwoord paar wanneer die dokument en vraag gegee word. Die interaksie tussen dokument, vraag en antwoordes is modelleer deur aandag mekanisme en 'n verskillende handfunksies word gebruik om model prestasie te verbeter. Ons gebruik ook Cove (McCann et al., 2017) as 'n eksterne bron van kennis wat nie in die dokument genoem word nie. As 'n resultaat, ons stelsel bereik 80,91% presies op die toets data, wat op die derde plek van die leierboard is.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጾች የስምEval-2018 ስራ 11-መኪን እውቀት የተጠቀሰውን የኮሞንስ እውቀት (ኦስቴርmann et al., 2018b) ለዓለምአቀፍ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ አካባቢነታችንን ያሳያል፡፡ We use a deep neural network model to choose the correct answer from the candidate answers pair when the document and question are given.  ሰነድ፣ ጥያቄ እና መልስ መካከል ግንኙነት በጥያቄ ማሰናከል እና በተለየ ዓይነቶች የሞዴል ድምፅ ማሻሻል ይጠቅማል፡፡ በሰነዱ ውስጥ ያልታወቀ ውጭ የውጭ እውቀት ምንጭ ሆነን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ As a result, our system achieves 80.91% accuracy on the test data, which is on the third place of the leaderboard.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) ilə Uluslararası İşləşmə Salonu üçün bizim göndərməyimizi 11-Machine Comprehension Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b) ilə paylaşır. Döküm və sual verildiyi zaman kandidəyin cavabını seçmək üçün çətin nöral a ğ modelini istifadə edirik. Dökümət, sual və cavab arasındakı müxtəlif məlumat mehanizmi ilə modelləşdirildir və modellərini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün müxtəlif məlumatlar kullanılır. Biz də CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) belədə deyil bir bilimin dış mənbəsi olaraq istifadə edirik. Sonuçta, sistemimiz testlər verilənlərin 80,91%-i doğruluğuna nail olur. Bu, liderboard üçüncü yerindədir.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ներկայացումը Սեմանտիկ Արժեքի միջազգային աշխատասենյակի (Halewal-2018) ընդհանուր առաջադրանքի 11- Մեքենայի ընկալումը օգտագործելով համայնական գիտելիքներ (Օստերմանն և այլն., 2018b). Մենք օգտագործում ենք խորը նյարդային ցանցի մոդել, որպեսզի ընտրենք ճիշտ պատասխանը թեկնածու պատասխաններից զույգից, երբ փաստաթղթին և հարցը տրվում են: Փաստողների, հարցերի և պատասխանների միջև փոխազդեցությունը մոդելվում է ուշադրության մեխանիզմի միջոցով, և մոդելի արդյունքների բարելավման համար օգտագործվում են ձեռքի տարբեր հատկություններ: Մենք նաև օգտագործում ենք COV (ՄակԿան և այլն., 2017) որպես գիտելիքների արտաքին աղբյուր, որը փաստաթուղնում չի նշված: Արդյունքում մեր համակարգը ստանում է 80.91 տոկոս ճշգրտություն փորձարկման տվյալների վրա, որը առաջնորդների երրորդ տեղում է:', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke za Međunarodno radionico o semantičkoj evaluaciji (SemEval-2018) zajednički zadatak 11-Mašinska komprehenzija koristeći znanje Commonsense (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Koristimo model duboke neuralne mreže kako bi izabrali ispravan odgovor od kandidata koji odgovara na par kada se dato dokument i pitanje. Interakcije između dokumenta, pitanja i odgovora modeliraju mehanizam pažnje i razne rukovne funkcije se koriste za poboljšanje model a. Također koristimo Cove (McCann et al., 2017) kao vanjski izvor znanja koji se ne spominje u dokumentu. Kao rezultat toga, naš sistem postiže tačnost 80,91% na testnim podacima, koji je na trećem mjestu vodeće ploče.', 'bn': 'This paper describes our submission for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) shared task 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b).  ডকুমেন্ট এবং প্রশ্ন প্রদান করার সময় প্রার্থী থেকে সঠিক উত্তর নির্বাচনের জন্য আমরা গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল ব্যবহার করি। নথি, প্রশ্ন এবং উত্তরের মধ্যে প্রতিযোগিতা মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে মডেল করা হয় এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের মাধ্যমের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী প্রদর্শনের জন্য আমরা কোভে (ম্যাকক্যান এন্ট আল ২০১৭) বাইরে জ্ঞানের উৎস হিসেবে ব্যবহার করি যা নথিতে উল্লেখ করা না। এর ফলে আমাদের সিস্টেম ৮০. ৯১% পরীক্ষার তথ্য সম্পর্কে সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করে, যা নেতৃতীয় স্থানে আছে।', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš příspěvek na Mezinárodní workshop sémantického hodnocení (SemEval-2018) sdílený úkol 11- Porozumění strojů s využitím obecných znalostí (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Používáme model hluboké neuronové sítě k výběru správné odpovědi z páru kandidátů odpovědí, když jsou dokument a otázka uvedeny. Interakce mezi dokumentem, otázkou a odpovědí jsou modelovány pomocí mechanismu pozornosti a k zlepšení výkonu modelu se používá řada manuálních funkcí. CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) využíváme také jako externí zdroj znalostí, který v dokumentu není zmíněn. Náš systém tak dosahuje 80,91% přesnosti testovacích dat, která je na třetím místě žebříčku.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan osallistumismme Semanttista arviointia käsittelevään kansainväliseen työpajaan (SemEval-2018) jaettuun tehtävään 11- Koneymmärrys Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Käytämme syväneuroverkkomallia, jolla valitaan oikea vastaus hakijan vastausparista, kun asiakirja ja kysymys annetaan. Asiakirjan, kysymyksen ja vastausten vuorovaikutusta mallinnetaan huomiomekanismilla ja mallin suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi käytetään erilaisia manuaalisia ominaisuuksia. Käytämme myös CoVe:tä (McCann et al., 2017) ulkoisena tiedonlähteenä, jota ei mainita asiakirjassa. Tämän seurauksena järjestelmämme saavuttaa 80,91% tarkkuuden testitiedoissa, joka on tulostaulukon kolmannella sijalla.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie ettepanekuid rahvusvahelisele semantilise hindamise seminarile (SemEval-2018) jagatud ülesandele 11 – masinate mõistmine, kasutades üldisi teadmisi (Ostermann et al., 2018b). Kasutame sügava närvivõrgu mudelit, et valida õige vastus kandidaadi vastuste paarilt dokumendi ja küsimuse esitamisel. Dokumendi, küsimuste ja vastuste vastastikust koostoimet modelleeritakse tähelepanumehhanismi abil ning mudeli jõudluse parandamiseks kasutatakse erinevaid käsitsi funktsioone. Samuti kasutame CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) välise teadmiste allikana, mida dokumendis ei ole mainitud. Selle tulemusena saavutab meie süsteem 80,91% täpsuse testide andmetel, mis on edetabeli kolmandal kohal.', 'ca': 'This paper describes our submission for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) shared task 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b).  We use a deep neural network model to choose the correct answer from the candidate answers pair when the document and question are given.  The interactions between document, question and answers are modeled by attention mechanism and a variety of manual features are used to improve model performance.  També utilitzem CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) com una font externa de coneixement que no es menciona en el document. As a result, our system achieves 80.91% accuracy on the test data, which is on the third place of the leaderboard.', 'ha': "Bu karatun na describe sallama wa Shirin International workspace on Semantic Assamince (SemEV-2018) wanda aka yi raba aikin 11- Machine Comprehension da Commonsense Cilmi (Okserman et al., 2018b). Tuna amfani da wani misali mai ƙaranci zuwa jerin neura don mu zãɓi jibar da gaske daga jayayin maraƙin idan an ba da takardar da tambayi. Cire-interaction tsakanin takarda, tambayi da jiban za'a motsa game da zane-zane-zane kuma ana yi amfani da wasu masu tsari na hannayen da za'a kyautata performance na misali. Tuna yi amfani da CoV (mcCann et al., 2017) kamar wata source na ƙarƙashin ilmi wanda ba a taɓa ba a cikin takardar. Kayya, na'uranmu yana sãmu tsarin 80.91 a kan data na jarraba, wanda ke kan na rubutun na farko.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje našo predložitev za mednarodno delavnico o semantičnem evalvaciji (SemEval-2018) skupno nalogo 11- Razumevanje strojev z uporabo splošnega znanja (Ostermann et al., 2018b). S pomočjo modela globokega živčnega omrežja izberemo pravilen odgovor med kandidatnim odgovorom, ko sta dokument in vprašanje podana. Interakcije med dokumentom, vprašanjem in odgovori so modelirane z mehanizmom pozornosti, za izboljšanje učinkovitosti modela pa se uporabljajo različne ročne funkcije. CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) uporabljamo tudi kot zunanji vir znanja, ki ni omenjen v dokumentu. Rezultat tega je naš sistem dosegel 80,91% natančnost podatkov o preskusu, ki je na tretjem mestu lestvice.', 'he': 'This paper describes our submission for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) shared task 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b).  אנחנו משתמשים בדוגמא רשת עצבית עמוקה כדי לבחור את התשובה הנכונה מהמועמד מתשובה זוג כאשר המסמך ושאלה נותנים. האינטראקציות בין מסמכים, שאלות ותשובות מודלים על ידי מנגנון תשומת לב ומגוון של תכונות ידניים משתמשים לשפר ביצועי מודל. אנחנו גם משתמשים CoVe (McCann et al., 2017) כמקור חיצוני של ידע שלא מוזכר במסמך. כתוצאה מכך, המערכת שלנו משיגה מדויקה של 80.91% על נתוני הבדיקה, אשר נמצא במקום השלישי של הלוח המנהיג.', 'jv': 'This paper describs the current report for the Global Workspace on semanti invaluation (seminval-2013) share task 11- Masjid Compréncion used Common Sense knowknowknowness (ostirmannet al. 2011 8 b). Awak dhéwé ngubah model sing nggambar alam kuwi nggawe responsing alam sing apik kebudhakan winih sing bakal terus nggawe dokumen lan kesempatan. Mekdahan karo akeh langgambar dokumen, suaraning lan gambaran sing modelele karo mekanimat ingkang manut lan akeh sampeyan Manual Awak dhéwé nglebokake Cove (MB et al), siji-siji diapakan seneng nggawe barang kelas nang toku. Yo wis rampung, sistem punika sing wis rampung awak dhéwé dadi nyong, iki dadi wis telu banjur ing sakjane konder.', 'bo': 'This paper describes our submission for the International Workshop on Semantic Evaluation (SemEval-2018) shared task 11- Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge (Ostermann et al., 2018b). ང་ཚོས་ཞུགས་པ་དང་འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་ཡིག ཡིག་གེའི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་དུ་མ་གླེང་བའི་ཕྱི་ཁོངས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཞིག་གིས་CoVe(McCann et al., 2017)ལ་སྤྱད་ནས། འོན་ཀྱང་། མ་ལག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གསལ་བཤད་ཚད་ལྟར་བཞིན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་གསུམ་པ་དེ་ཐོབ་རྒྱུ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Lyb3b at SemEval-2018 Task 11 : Machine Comprehension Task using Deep Learning Models', 'ar': 'Lyb3b في SemEval-2018 المهمة 11: مهمة فهم الآلة باستخدام نماذج التعلم العميق', 'es': 'LYB3b en SemeVal-2018 Tarea 11: Tarea de comprensión automática mediante modelos de aprendizaje profundo', 'fr': "LYB3b au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 11\xa0: Tâche de compréhension automatique à l'aide de modèles d'apprentissage profond", 'pt': 'Lyb3b na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 11: Tarefa de compreensão de máquina usando modelos de aprendizado profundo', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のLyb 3 bタスク11 ：ディープラーニングモデルを使用した機械理解タスク', 'zh': 'Lyb3b at SemEval-2018 务 11:用深学机器知务', 'ru': 'Lyb3b на SemEval-2018 Задача 11: Задача машинного понимания с использованием моделей глубокого обучения', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 11 पर Lyb3b: डीप लर्निंग मॉडल का उपयोग करके मशीन समझ कार्य', 'ga': 'Lyb3b ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Tasc Tuiscint Inneall ag Úsáid Múnlaí Deepfhoghlama', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 11: Εργασία κατανόησης μηχανών χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης', 'hu': 'Lyb3b a SemEval-2018 11. feladat: Gépi megértési feladat mélytanulási modellek segítségével', 'it': 'Lyb3b al SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task utilizzando modelli di Deep Learning', 'lt': 'Lyb3b SemEval-2018 11 užduotis: mašinų supratimo užduotis naudojant gilaus mokymosi modelius', 'kk': 'Lyb3b жарым- Eval- 2018 тапсырмасы 11: Машин қиындығын түсіндіру үлгілерін қолдану тапсырмасы', 'mk': 'Lyb3b на SemEval-2018 задача 11: задача за машинско разбирање користејќи модели за длабоко учење', 'ms': 'Lyb3b at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task using Deep Learning Models', 'mt': 'Lyb3b at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task using Deep Learning Models', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ ലിബ്3b: ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് യന്ത്രം പുതുക്കുന്ന പണി', 'mn': 'Lyb3b at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task using Deep Learning Models', 'pl': 'Lyb3b w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 11: Zadanie zrozumienia maszyn z wykorzystaniem modeli głębokiego uczenia', 'no': 'Lyb3b på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 11: Maskinekomprehensingsoppgåve ved bruk av dyppa læringsmodeller', 'si': 'Lyb3b at HalfEvel-2018 Job 11: machine Comprention Job Using Deep Training Models', 'so': 'Lyb3b at SemEval-2018 Shaqooyinka 11: Mashine Comprehension Shaqooyin using Deep Learning Models', 'ro': 'Lyb3b la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 11: Sarcina de înțelegere a mașinilor folosind modele de învățare profundă', 'sr': 'Lyb3b na semiEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task koristeći model dubokog učenja', 'sv': 'Lyb3b på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 11: Maskinförståelse Uppgift med hjälp av djupinlärningsmodeller', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 செயல் 11: இயந்திரம் முழுமைப்படுத்தல் பணி', 'ur': 'سیم Eval-2018 ٹاکس 11 میں Lyb3b: عمیق سیکھنے موڈل کے استعمال سے ماشین کمپرنسیون ٹاکس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Lybbbbbb tại SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 11: Machine Compention Task using Deep Learning Models', 'bg': 'Задача 11: Задача за разбиране на машината с помощта на модели за дълбоко обучение', 'nl': 'Lyb3b op SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Machine Comprehension Taak met behulp van Deep Learning Modellen', 'da': 'Lyb3b på SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Maskinforståelsesopgave ved hjælp af Deep Learning modeller', 'de': 'Lyb3b bei SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task mit Deep Learning Modellen', 'hr': 'Lyb3b na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11: zadatak za komprenciju strojeva koristeći model dubokog učenja', 'ko': 'Lyb3b가SemEval-18 퀘스트 11: 심도 있는 학습 모형을 사용하는 기계 이해 퀘스트', 'id': 'Lyb3b di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Tugas Pemahaman Mesin menggunakan Model Belajar Dalam', 'sw': 'Lyb3b katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 11: Kazi ya kompyuta ya Mashine kwa kutumia Modeli ya Kufundisha Deep', 'tr': 'Lyb3b at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task using Deep Learning Models', 'fa': 'Lyb3b در مامور نیم Eval-2018 کار ۱۱: ماشین تجربه با استفاده از مدل یادگیری عمیق', 'sq': 'Lyb3b në SemEval-2018 Task 11: Task Machine Comprehension Using Deep Learning Models', 'af': 'Lyb3b by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 11: Masjien Komprimensie Opdrag gebruik Deep Leer Modelle', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 11: Machine Comprehension Task using Deep Learn Models', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2018 কাজ ১১: গভীর শিক্ষা মোডেল ব্যবহার করে মেশিন সম্পূর্ণ কাজ', 'ca': 'Lyb3b a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Comprehension Machine Using Deep Learning Models', 'az': 'Yarım Eval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task using Deep Learning Models', 'bs': 'Lyb3b na semiEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task koristeći model dubokog učenja', 'et': 'Lyb3b SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 11: Masina mõistmise ülesanne sügavõppe mudelite abil', 'cs': 'Úloha 11: Úloha strojového porozumění pomocí modelů hlubokého učení', 'fi': 'Lyb3b SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 11: Koneen ymmärtäminen tehtävä syväoppimisen mallien avulla', 'jv': 'Lib3 b at semiinval-2008 task 11: Masine Comprerension tasks use deep Learning model', 'ha': 'Lyb3b at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task using Deep Learning Models', 'sk': 'Lyb3b na SemEval-2018 naloga 11: naloga razumevanja strojev z uporabo modelov globokega učenja', 'bo': 'Lyb3b at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension Task using Deep Learning Models', 'he': 'Comment'}
{'en': 'Machine Comprehension of text is a typical Natural Language Processing task which remains an elusive challenge. This paper is to solve the task 11 of SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge task. We use deep learning model to solve the problem. We build distributed word embedding of text, question and answering respectively instead of manually extracting features by linguistic tools. Meanwhile, we use a series of frameworks such as CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM with attention model and biLSTM with attention model for processing word vector. Experiments demonstrate the superior performance of biLSTM with attention framework compared to other models. We also delete high frequency words and combine word vector and data augmentation methods, achieved a certain effect. The approach we proposed rank 6th in official results, with accuracy rate of 0.7437 in test dataset.', 'ar': 'يعد فهم الآلة للنص مهمة نموذجية لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية والتي لا تزال تمثل تحديًا بعيد المنال. تهدف هذه الورقة إلى حل المهمة 11 من SemEval-2018 ، فهم الآلة باستخدام مهمة Commonsense Knowledge. نستخدم نموذج التعلم العميق لحل المشكلة. نقوم ببناء تضمين الكلمات الموزعة للنص والسؤال والإجابة على التوالي بدلاً من استخراج الميزات يدويًا بواسطة الأدوات اللغوية. وفي الوقت نفسه ، نستخدم سلسلة من الأطر مثل نموذج CNN ونموذج LSTM و LSTM مع نموذج الانتباه و biLSTM مع نموذج الانتباه لمعالجة متجه الكلمات. توضح التجارب الأداء المتفوق لـ biLSTM مع إطار الانتباه مقارنة بالنماذج الأخرى. نقوم أيضًا بحذف الكلمات عالية التردد ودمج متجه الكلمات وطرق زيادة البيانات ، وحققنا تأثيرًا معينًا. النهج الذي اقترحناه في المرتبة السادسة في النتائج الرسمية ، مع معدل دقة 0.7437 في مجموعة بيانات الاختبار.', 'es': 'La comprensión automática del texto es una tarea típica de procesamiento del lenguaje natural que sigue siendo un desafío difícil de alcanzar. Este artículo es para resolver la tarea 11 de SemEval-2018, la tarea Comprensión de máquinas utilizando el conocimiento de sentido común. Utilizamos el modelo de aprendizaje profundo para resolver el problema. Creamos la incrustación de palabras distribuidas de texto, preguntas y respuestas, respectivamente, en lugar de extraer manualmente las funciones mediante herramientas lingüísticas. Mientras tanto, utilizamos una serie de marcos como el modelo CNN, el modelo LSTM, el modelo LSTM con atención y BilSTM con el modelo de atención para procesar el vector de palabras. Los experimentos demuestran el rendimiento superior de BilsTM con marco de atención en comparación con otros modelos. También eliminamos palabras de alta frecuencia y combinamos métodos de aumento de datos y vector de palabras, logrando un cierto efecto. El enfoque que proponemos ocupa el sexto lugar en los resultados oficiales, con una tasa de precisión de 0.7437 en el conjunto de datos de prueba.', 'fr': "La compréhension automatique du texte est une tâche typique de traitement du langage naturel qui reste un défi difficile à relever. Cet article a pour but de résoudre la tâche 11 de SemEval-2018, Compréhension automatique à l'aide de la tâche Commonsense Knowledge. Nous utilisons un modèle d'apprentissage profond pour résoudre le problème. Nous construisons l'intégration distribuée de texte, de question et de réponse respectivement au lieu d'extraire manuellement des fonctionnalités par des outils linguistiques. Pendant ce temps, nous utilisons une série de cadres tels que le modèle CNN, le modèle LSTM, le modèle LSTM avec modèle d'attention et BilsTM avec modèle d'attention pour le traitement du vecteur de mots. Les expériences démontrent les performances supérieures de BilsTM avec le cadre d'attention par rapport aux autres modèles. Nous supprimons également les mots à haute fréquence et combinons des méthodes de vecteur de mots et d'augmentation de données, obtenant un certain effet. L'approche que nous avons proposée se classe 6e dans les résultats officiels, avec un taux de précision de 0,7437 dans l'ensemble de données de test.", 'pt': 'A compreensão de texto por máquina é uma tarefa típica de processamento de linguagem natural que continua sendo um desafio indescritível. Este trabalho tem como objetivo resolver a tarefa 11 do SemEval-2018, tarefa de Compreensão de Máquina usando Conhecimento Comum. Usamos o modelo de aprendizado profundo para resolver o problema. Construímos a incorporação de palavras distribuídas de texto, pergunta e resposta, respectivamente, em vez de extrair recursos manualmente por ferramentas linguísticas. Enquanto isso, usamos uma série de frameworks como modelo CNN, modelo LSTM, LSTM com modelo de atenção e biLSTM com modelo de atenção para processamento de vetor de palavras. Experimentos demonstram o desempenho superior do biLSTM com estrutura de atenção em comparação com outros modelos. Também excluímos palavras de alta frequência e combinamos métodos de vetor de palavras e aumento de dados, alcançando um certo efeito. A abordagem que propomos ocupa o 6º lugar nos resultados oficiais, com taxa de precisão de 0,7437 no conjunto de dados de teste.', 'ja': 'テキストの機械理解は、難解な課題であり続ける典型的な自然言語処理タスクです。この論文は、SemEval -2018の課題11、コモンセンス・ナレッジ・タスクを使用した機械理解を解決するためのものである。私たちはディープラーニングモデルを使用して問題を解決します。私たちは、言語ツールによって特徴を手動で抽出するのではなく、それぞれテキスト、質問、回答の分散ワード埋め込みを構築します。一方、我々は、CNNモデル、LSTMモデル、注意を払ったLSTMモデル、およびワードベクトルを処理する注意を払ったBiLSTMモデルなどの一連のフレームワークを使用している。実験は、他のモデルと比較して、注意のフレームワークを備えたbiLSTMの優れたパフォーマンスを実証している。また、高頻度の単語を削除し、ワードベクトルとデータ拡張の方法を組み合わせることで、一定の効果を実現しました。私たちが提案したアプローチは、試験データセットの精度は0.7437で、公式結果では6位でした。', 'hi': 'पाठ की मशीन समझ एक विशिष्ट प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्य है जो एक मायावी चुनौती बनी हुई है। यह पेपर SemEval-2018 के कार्य 11 को हल करने के लिए है, कॉमनसेंस नॉलेज टास्क का उपयोग करके मशीन कॉम्प्रिहेंशन। हम समस्या को हल करने के लिए गहरे सीखने के मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं। हम भाषाई उपकरणों द्वारा मैन्युअल रूप से सुविधाओं को निकालने के बजाय क्रमशः पाठ, प्रश्न और उत्तर के वितरित शब्द एम्बेडिंग का निर्माण करते हैं। इस बीच, हम इस तरह के सीएनएन मॉडल, LSTM मॉडल, ध्यान मॉडल के साथ LSTM और शब्द वेक्टर प्रसंस्करण के लिए ध्यान मॉडल के साथ biLSTM के रूप में चौखटे की एक श्रृंखला का उपयोग करें। प्रयोग अन्य मॉडलों की तुलना में ध्यान ढांचे के साथ biLSTM के बेहतर प्रदर्शन का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हम उच्च आवृत्ति वाले शब्दों को भी हटाते हैं और शब्द वेक्टर और डेटा संवर्धन विधियों को जोड़ते हैं, एक निश्चित प्रभाव प्राप्त करते हैं। जिस दृष्टिकोण को हमने परीक्षण डेटासेट में 0.7437 की सटीकता दर के साथ आधिकारिक परिणामों में 6 वें स्थान पर प्रस्तावित किया था।', 'ru': 'Машинное понимание текста является типичной задачей обработки естественного языка, которая остается труднодостижимой задачей. Эта статья предназначена для решения задачи 11 SemEval-2018 «Понимание машины с помощью задачи« Знание здравого смысла ». Для решения проблемы мы используем модель глубокого обучения. Вместо того, чтобы вручную извлекать признаки с помощью лингвистических средств, мы строим распределенное словосочетание текста, вопроса и ответа соответственно. Между тем, мы используем ряд фреймворков, таких как модель CNN, модель LSTM, модель LSTM с моделью внимания и модель biLSTM с моделью внимания для обработки вектора слов. Эксперименты демонстрируют превосходную производительность biLSTM с рамкой внимания по сравнению с другими моделями. Также мы удаляем высокочастотные слова и совмещаем слово-вектор и методы дополнения данных, достигаем определенного эффекта. Предлагаемый нами подход занимает 6-е место по официальным результатам, с коэффициентом точности 0,7437 в тестовом наборе данных.', 'zh': '机器文本一自然语言,犹是一难测。 旨在解SemEval-2018之务11,用常识之机器解。 吾以深学模形解之。 各构文本,与对案分布式单词嵌,非语言器手动取特征。 CNN、LSTM、LSTM、意、框架以治文字向量。 实验比诸模样,biLSTM在框架下有优越之性。 删去高频词,合词向量据增强之法,以取其效。 臣等之法排名第6于官方,测试数据集之准确率为0.7437。', 'ga': 'Is gnáth-thasc Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha é Tuiscint Mheaine ar théacs agus is dúshlán do-ghlactha é i gcónaí. Tá an páipéar seo chun tasc 11 de SemEval-2018, Tuiscint Meaisín a réiteach ag baint úsáide as tasc Commonsense Knowledge. Bainimid úsáid as samhail foghlama domhain chun an fhadhb a réiteach. Déanaimid leabú focal dáilte de théacs, ceist agus freagra faoi seach in ionad gnéithe a bhaint de láimh le huirlisí teanga. Idir an dá linn, úsáidimid sraith creataí cosúil le múnla CNN, múnla LSTM, LSTM le múnla aird agus biLSTM le múnla aird le haghaidh próiseála veicteoir focal. Léiríonn turgnaimh feidhmíocht níos fearr biLSTM le creat aird i gcomparáid le samhlacha eile. Scriosaimid freisin focail ardmhinicíochta agus comhcheanglaímid veicteoir focal agus modhanna méadaithe sonraí, baineadh amach éifeacht áirithe. Bhí an cur chuige a mholamar sa 6ú háit i dtorthaí oifigiúla, le ráta cruinnis de 0.7437 i tacar sonraí tástála.', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση του κειμένου είναι μια τυπική εργασία επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας που παραμένει μια απαίσια πρόκληση. Αυτή η εργασία είναι να λύσει το καθήκον 11 του έργου Κατανόηση μηχανών χρησιμοποιώντας την εργασία Κοινής Γνώσης. Χρησιμοποιούμε μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης για να λύσουμε το πρόβλημα. Κατασκευάζουμε κατανεμημένη ενσωμάτωση λέξεων κειμένου, ερώτησης και απάντησης αντίστοιχα αντί να εξάγουμε χειροκίνητα χαρακτηριστικά με γλωσσικά εργαλεία. Εν τω μεταξύ, χρησιμοποιούμε μια σειρά πλαισίων όπως το μοντέλο με το μοντέλο προσοχής και με το μοντέλο προσοχής για την επεξεργασία του διανυσματικού λόγου. Τα πειράματα καταδεικνύουν την ανώτερη απόδοση του με πλαίσιο προσοχής σε σύγκριση με άλλα μοντέλα. Διαγράφουμε επίσης τις λέξεις υψηλής συχνότητας και συνδυάζουμε τις μεθόδους αύξησης λέξεων και δεδομένων, επιτυγχάνοντας ένα συγκεκριμένο αποτέλεσμα. Η προσέγγιση που προτείναμε κατατάσσεται 6η στα επίσημα αποτελέσματα, με ποσοστό ακρίβειας 0.7437 στο σύνολο δεδομένων δοκιμής.', 'it': "La comprensione automatica del testo è un tipico compito di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale che rimane una sfida sfuggente. Questo articolo è per risolvere il compito 11 di SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension utilizzando Commonsense Knowledge task. Usiamo il modello di deep learning per risolvere il problema. Costruiamo l'embedding distribuito di parole di testo, domande e risposte rispettivamente invece di estrarre manualmente funzionalità da strumenti linguistici. Nel frattempo, utilizziamo una serie di framework come modello CNN, modello LSTM, LSTM con modello di attenzione e biLSTM con modello di attenzione per l'elaborazione del vettore di parole. Gli esperimenti dimostrano le prestazioni superiori di biLSTM con struttura di attenzione rispetto ad altri modelli. Cancelliamo anche le parole ad alta frequenza e combiniamo il vettore di parole e i metodi di aumento dei dati, ottenuto un certo effetto. L'approccio proposto si colloca al sesto posto nei risultati ufficiali, con un tasso di accuratezza di 0,7437 nel set di dati di test.", 'hu': 'A szöveg gépi megértése tipikus természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladat, amely továbbra is megfoghatatlan kihívás. Ez a tanulmány a SemEval-2018, Gépi megértés 11. feladatának megoldását szolgálja Commonsense Knowledge feladat segítségével. Mélytanulási modellt használunk a probléma megoldására. Szöveg, kérdés és válasz elosztott szóbeágyazását építjük a nyelvi eszközök segítségével történő manuális kibontás helyett. Eközben számos keretrendszert használunk, mint például CNN modellt, LSTM modellt, LSTM figyelemmodellt és biLSTM figyelemmodellt a szóvektorok feldolgozására. A kísérletek bizonyítják a biLSTM kiváló teljesítményét figyelemre méltó keretrendszerrel, mint más modellek. Emellett töröljük a nagy frekvenciájú szavakat, kombináljuk a szóvektoros és az adatbővítési módszereket, elérve egy bizonyos hatást. Az általunk javasolt megközelítés hatodik helyen áll a hivatalos eredmények között, a tesztadatok pontossága 0,7437.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის მაქსინური კომპრესენცია ტიპური ნაირადი ენერგიის პროცესი რაოდენობა, რომელიც დარჩენა არსებელი გამოცდილება. ეს წიგნი არის SemEval-2018-ის 11-ის დავალება, მაქინის კომპრენსცია, რომელიც Commonsense Knowledge დავალების გამოყენება. ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ ძალიან სწავლების მოდელს პრობლემას გაუკეთებლად. ჩვენ შევქმნით ტექსტის, კითხვის და პასუხის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძ Meanwhile, we use a series of frameworks such as CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM with attention model and biLSTM with attention model for processing word vector. ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტების უფრო მეტი პროცემენტის გამოყენება, რომელიც დაახლოებით სხვა მოდელთან. ჩვენ ასევე უფრო მეტი სიტყვების წაშლა და სიტყვების გვეკტორი და მონაცემების აგგენტირება მეტივების შემდეგ გავაკეთებთ განსაკუთრებული ეფექ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ დავიწყენოთ სწორედ მე-6 წერტილის მონაცემებში, რომელიც მართლაც 0,7437 წერტილია ტესტის მონაცემებში.', 'mk': 'Машинско разбирање на текстот е типична задача за процес на природен јазик која останува неизбежен предизвик. Овој документ е за решавање на задачата 11 на SemEval-2018, Машинско разбирање користејќи задача за заедничко знаење. Користиме модел за длабоко учење за решавање на проблемот. Ние изградуваме дистрибуирано вградување на зборови на текст, прашања и одговори, односно наместо рачно да ги извадиме карактеристиките со лингвистички алатки. Во меѓувреме, користиме серија рамки како што се CNN модел, LSTM модел, LSTM со модел на внимание и biLSTM со модел на внимание за обработување на зборови вектор. Експериментите ја демонстрираат супериорната перформанса на biLSTM со рамка за внимание во споредба со други модели. Исто така ги избришуваме зборовите со висока фреквенција и ги комбинираме зборовите вектори и методите за зголемување на податоците, постигнавме одреден ефект. Пристапот кој го предложивме е на 6-ти ранг во официјалните резултати, со точност од 0,7437 во тестовите податоци.', 'ms': 'Pemahaman Mesin teks adalah tugas Pemprosesan Bahasa Biasa yang biasa yang tetap tantangan yang tidak jelas. Kertas ini untuk menyelesaikan tugas 11 SemEval-2018, Pemahaman Mesin menggunakan tugas pengetahuan umum. Kami menggunakan model belajar dalam untuk menyelesaikan masalah. Kami membangun penyembelihan perkataan yang disebarkan bagi teks, soalan dan jawapan secara berdasarkan selain daripada mengekstrak ciri-ciri secara manual dengan alat bahasa. Meanwhile, we use a series of frameworks such as CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM with attention model and biLSTM with attention model for processing word vector.  Eksperimen menunjukkan prestasi terbaik biLSTM dengan kerangka perhatian dibandingkan dengan model lain. We also delete high frequency words and combine word vector and data augmentation methods, achieved a certain effect.  pendekatan yang kami cadangkan peringkat ke-6 dalam keputusan rasmi, dengan kadar ketepatan 0.7437 dalam set data ujian.', 'kk': 'Мәтіннің машинаның көмекшелігі - қалыпты Түзіндік тілді өзгерту тапсырмасы. Бұл әсер етілмеген мәселе болады. Бұл қағаз, Commonsense білім тапсырмасын қолдану үшін, SemEval-2018 деген 11- тапсырманы шешу үшін. Біз мәселеді шешу үшін тұтас оқыту үлгісін қолданамыз. Біз мәтін, сұрақ және жауап беру үшін тілдік құрылғылар арқылы, тілік құрылғылар арқылы қасиеттерді қолмен тарқату орнына таратылған сөздерді құрамыз. Сонымен біз CNN үлгісі, LSTM үлгісі, LSTM үлгісі мен biLSTM үлгісімен сөз векторын өзгерту үшін қарау үлгісін қолданамыз. Тәжірибелер басқа үлгілерімен салыстырып, biLSTM жұмыс істеуін көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, жиілік сөздерді жою және сөздерді вектор мен деректерді көбейту әдістерін біріктіріп, кейбір эффекті жеткіздік. Біз официалдық нәтижелерде 6-ші деңгейіндегі тәсілді, сынақ деректер жиынында 0,7437 деңгейіндегі дұрыс.', 'ml': 'Machine Comprehension of text is a typical Natural Language Processing task which remains an elusive challenge.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d കോമണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് അറിവ് ജോലി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുവാന്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലി 11 ന്റെ ജോലി  പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം വാക്കുകള്\u200d വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നത്, ചോദ്യം, ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതും ഉത്തര അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d സിഎന്\u200d ന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d, LSTM മോഡല്\u200d, LSTM മോഡല്\u200d, ശ്രദ്ധ മോഡലും ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റിഎമും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പ മറ്റു മോഡലുകളോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dത്ത് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റിംഎമിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച പ്രദര്\u200dശനം കാണിച് അത്യുന്നധിക വാക്കുകളും നാം മായ്ച്ചുകളയുകയും, വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റരും ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടുവാനുള്ള രീതികളും കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക് ഓഫീസല്\u200d ഫലങ്ങളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിച്ച സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ 6 മുന്നില്\u200d, പരീക്ഷ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d 0.', 'lt': 'Mašinos teksto supratimas yra tipiška gamtos kalbų apdorojimo užduotis, kuri tebėra neišvengiamas uždavinys. Šis dokumentas skirtas 11-ajam SemEval-2018 uždaviniui „Mašinų suvokimas naudojant bendrosios žinios užduotį“ išspręsti. Mes naudojame gilaus mokymosi model į problemai išspręsti. Užuot rankiniu būdu ištraukę savybes kalbinėmis priemonėmis sukuriame atitinkamai teksto, klausimų ir atsakymų įtraukimą į paskirstytus žodžius. Tuo tarpu naudojame įvairias sistemas, pvz., CNN model į, LSTM modelį, LSTM su dėmesio modeliu ir biLSTM su dėmesio modeliu žodžių vektoriui apdoroti. Eksperimentai rodo, kad biLSTM veiksmingumas yra geresnis, atsižvelgiant į dėmesį, palyginti su kitais modeliais. We also delete high frequency words and combine word vector and data augmentation methods, achieved a certain effect.  Mes pasiūlėme 6-ąjį rangą oficialiuose rezultatuose, o tikslumo lygis bandymų duomenų rinkinyje yra 0,7437.', 'no': 'Komprimering av tekst er ein typisk naturspråk- handteringsoppgåve som forblir eit utfordring. Denne papiren er å løysa oppgåva 11 av semiEval-2018, maskinekomprehension med Commonsense Knowledge oppgåva. Vi brukar dypt læringsmodell for å løysa problemet. Vi bygger distribuert ord innebygging av tekst, spørsmål og svar i staden for manuelt utpakking av funksjonar med språkkverktøy. Med mellomtida bruker vi ei rekkje rammeverk som CNN-modell, LSTM-modell, LSTM med oppmerksmodell og biLSTM med oppmerksmodell for handsaming av ordvektor. Eksperimentar viser høgre utvikling av biLSTM med oppmerksområde samanlikna med andre modeller. Vi slettar også høg frekvensord og kombinerer ordvektorar og dataaugmentasjonsmetodar, og oppnådd ein bestemt effekt. Den tilnærminga vi foreslåde rekninga 6. i offisielle resultat, med nøyaktighetsrate 0,7437 i testdatasettet.', 'mt': 'Il-komprensjoni tal-makkinarju tat-test hija kompitu tipiku tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali li għadu sfida elużiva. Dan id-dokument għandu jsolvi l-kompitu 11 tas-SemEval-2018, Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju bl-użu tal-kompitu ta’ Għarfien Komuni. Aħna nużaw mudell ta’ tagħlim profond biex issolvi l-problema. Aħna nibnu l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem distribwit tat-test, il-mistoqsijiet u t-tweġibiet rispettivament minflok neħħew karatteristiċi manwali permezz ta’ għodod lingwistiċi. Sadanittant, a ħna nużaw serje ta’ oqfsa bħall-mudell CNN, il-mudell LSTM, l-LSTM bil-mudell ta’ attenzjoni u l-biLSTM bil-mudell ta’ attenzjoni għall-ipproċessar tal-vettur tal-kliem. L-esperimenti juru l-prestazzjoni superjuri tal-biLSTM b’qafas ta’ attenzjoni meta mqabbel ma’ mudelli oħra. Aħna nħassru wkoll kliem ta’ frekwenza għolja u ngħaqdu l-metodi tal-vettur tal-kliem u tal-augmentazzjoni tad-dejta, kisbu ċertu effett. L-approċċ li pproponejna kien is-sitt grad fir-riżultati uffiċjali, b’rata ta’ preċiżjoni ta’ 0.7437 fis-sett tad-dejta tat-testijiet.', 'mn': 'Текст машины комплекс бол энгийн Байгалийн хэл Процесс үйл ажиллагаа. Энэ нь буруу сорилт байдаг. Энэ цаас нь SemEval-2018 оны 11 ажлыг шийдэх юм. Бид асуудлыг шийдэхэд гүн гүнзгий суралцах загварыг ашигладаг. Бид текст, асуулт, хариулт өгсөн үгийг хэлний хэрэгсэл дээр гараараа гараараа гаргах оронд хуваагдсан үгийг бүтээж байна. Тэр үед бид CNN загвар, LSTM загвар, LSTM-г анхаарал загвартай, biLSTM-г үгийн векторын ажиллах анхаарал загвартай ашигладаг. БиЛСТМ-ийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг бусад загваруудыг харьцуулахад анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид мөн ихэвчлэн хэмжээний үгийг устгаж, үг вектор болон өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэх арга замыг нэгтгэхэд тодорхой нөлөөтэй болсон. Бидний санал болгон официальны үр дүн дээр 6-р дүр зургаан дүр зургаан дүр зургаан, шалгалтын өгөгдлийн санд 0.7437 зөв дүр зургаатай.', 'pl': 'Maszynowe zrozumienie tekstu jest typowym zadaniem przetwarzania języka naturalnego, które pozostaje nieuchwytnym wyzwaniem. Niniejszy artykuł ma na celu rozwiązanie zadania 11 SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension przy użyciu zadania Commonsense Knowledge. Używamy modelu głębokiego uczenia, aby rozwiązać problem. Budujemy rozproszone osadzanie tekstu, pytań i odpowiednich odpowiednich odpowiednich odpowiednich słów zamiast ręcznego wyodrębniania cech za pomocą narzędzi językowych. Tymczasem używamy serii frameworków takich jak model CNN, model LSTM, LSTM z modelem uwagi i biLSTM z modelem uwagi do przetwarzania wektora tekstu. Eksperymenty pokazują lepszą wydajność biLSTM z frameworkiem uwagi w porównaniu do innych modeli. Usuwamy również słowa o wysokiej częstotliwości i łączymy metody wektora słowa i powiększania danych, osiągnęły pewien efekt. Podejście zaproponowane zostało szóste miejsce w oficjalnych wynikach, z dokładnością 0.7437 w zbiorze danych testowych.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea automată a textului este o sarcină tipică de procesare a limbajului natural, care rămâne o provocare evazivă. Această lucrare este de a rezolva sarcina 11 a SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension utilizând sarcina Cunoștințelor Commonsense. Folosim modelul de învățare profundă pentru a rezolva problema. Construim încorporarea distribuită de cuvinte a textului, a întrebărilor și respectiv a răspunsurilor în loc de extragerea manuală a caracteristicilor prin instrumente lingvistice. Între timp, folosim o serie de cadre precum modelul CNN, modelul LSTM, LSTM cu model de atenție și biLSTM cu model de atenție pentru procesarea vectorului de cuvinte. Experimentele demonstrează performanța superioară a biLSTM cu cadru de atenție comparativ cu alte modele. De asemenea, ștergem cuvintele de înaltă frecvență și combinăm vectorul de cuvinte și metodele de augmentare a datelor, obținând un anumit efect. Abordarea propusă se clasează pe locul 6 în rezultatele oficiale, cu o rată de precizie de 0,7437 în setul de date de testare.', 'so': "Machinka u baaraandegista qoraalka waa shaqo u baaraandegista afka asalka ah oo ku hadhaya dhibaato khatar ah. Kanu waa in uu ku xalliyo shaqada 11 ee SemEval-2018, kaalmada mashiinka ee isticmaalka shaqada aqoonta Commons. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaababka waxbarashada mool dheer si aan u xalaano dhibaatada. Waxaan dhisaynaa hadal qaybsan oo ku qoran qoraal, su'aal iyo jawaab ugu qoran si gaar ah ayadoo aan gacmo u soo saarno qalabka luuqadaha. Meanwhile, we use a series of frameworks such as CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM with attention model and biLSTM with attention model for processing word vector.  Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda muuqashada tababarka ugu sareeya ee biLSTM, taasoo la barbardhiga tusaalooyin kale. Sidoo kale ayaannu iska ridnaa hadal aad u fara badan, waxaynu isku darnaa waddooyinka kordhiska iyo macluumaadka, waxayna gaadhay saameyn cayiman. Dhaqdhaqaaqa aan soo jeednay fasalka 6aad ee arimaha rasmiga ah, waxayna ku jirtay qiimaha rasmiga ah 0.7437 oo ku qoran tijaabada.", 'sr': 'Mašinska kompresija teksta je tipičan prirodni zadatak za procesiranje jezika koji ostaje neizbežni izazov. Ovaj papir je da rešimo zadatak 11 od SemEval-2018, komprencija mašine koristeći zadatak za znanje Komunisansa. Koristimo model dubokog učenja da riješimo problem. Izgradili smo raspodjeljenu reč uključujući tekst, pitanje i odgovor, umesto rukovno izvlačenja karakteristika jezičkim alatima. U međuvremenu, koristimo seriju okvira poput CNN model a, LSTM modela, LSTM sa pažnjom modela i biLSTM sa pažnjom modelom za obradu vektora riječi. Eksperimenti pokazuju nadmoćnu funkciju biLSTM sa pažnjom u usporedbi s drugim modelima. Takoðe izbrisamo reèi visoke frekvencije i kombinujemo reèi vektora i metode povećanja podataka, postigli smo odreðeni efekt. Pristup koji smo predložili je 6. redak u službenim rezultatima, s preciznošću 0,7437 u testnom setu podataka.', 'si': 'පස්සේ පස්සේ මැෂින් සම්පූර්ණය සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස කර්මයක් විතරයි. ඒක නිසා ප්\u200dරශ්න මේ පත්තුව තමයි සෙම්වෙල්-2018 ගේ වැඩ 11 විසඳන්න, මැෂින් සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. අපි පාළ, ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් විතරයි, භාෂාත්මක උපකරණ සඳහා භාෂාත්මක විශේෂ අන්තර්යයෙන්, අපි CNN මොඩේල්, LSTM මොඩේල්, LSTM අවධානයක් සහ biLSTM වචන වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියා කරන්න අවධානයක් සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා  පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ biLSTM ගේ උපරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරභාව පෙන්වන්නේ අනිත් මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක අවස්ථාවක්  අපි ඉහළ සාමාන්\u200dය වචන් මතක් කරනවා වචන වෙක්ටර් සහ දත්ත විශාලනය විදියට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, විශේෂ ප්\u200dරත අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් 6වෙනි ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කරනවා, පරීක්ෂණා දත්ත සැ', 'ta': 'உரையின் இயந்திரம் முடிப்பு இயற்கையான இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு பணி இந்த தாள் செம்Eval- 2018 செய்தியை தீர்க்க, பொறியின் அறிவு பணியை பயன்படுத்தி இயந்திரம் முடிவு. நாம் பிரச்சனையை தீர்வு செய்ய ஆழமான கற்றல் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். நாங்கள் மொழி கருவிகளால் கைமுறையாக வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு பதிலாக உரை, கேள்வி மற்றும் பங்கிடப்பட்ட வார்த்தை உருவாக்கு இப்போது, நாம் CNN மாதிரி, LSTM மாதிரி, LSTM மாதிரி, கவனம் மாதிரி மற்றும் பில்எஸ்டிஎம் மாதிரியில் கவனம் மாதிரி செயல்படுத்தும் வார்த்தை  மற்ற மாதிரிகளுக்கு ஒப்பிடும் கவனத்தின் சட்டத்துடன் பிஎல்எஸ்டிஎமின் மேலான செயல்பாட்டை சோதனைகள் காட்ட அதிக frequency words நீக்கி வார்த்தை வெக்டர் மற்றும் தரவு கூட்டுதல் முறைகளை இணைத்து, குறிப்பிட்ட விளைவு அடைந்தது. நாங்கள் தேர்வு தரவு அமைப்பில் சரியான விகிதம் 0. 7437 தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட சரியான விகிதத்தில் 6 முன்நிர்ண', 'sv': 'Maskinförståelse av text är en typisk Natural Language Processing uppgift som fortfarande är en svårfångad utmaning. Denna uppsats är att lösa uppgift 11 i SemEval-2018, Maskinförståelse med Commonsense Knowledge-uppgift. Vi använder djupinlärningsmodellen för att lösa problemet. Vi bygger distribuerad ordinbäddning av text, fråga och svar istället för att manuellt extrahera funktioner med språkliga verktyg. Samtidigt använder vi en serie ramverk som CNN modell, LSTM modell, LSTM med uppmärksamhetsmodell och biLSTM med uppmärksamhetsmodell för bearbetning av ordvektor. Experiment visar den överlägsna prestandan hos biLSTM med uppmärksamhet ramverk jämfört med andra modeller. Vi tar också bort högfrekventa ord och kombinerar ordvektor och dataförstärkningsmetoder, uppnått en viss effekt. Det tillvägagångssätt vi föreslog rankas 6:e i officiella resultat, med noggrannhet på 0,7437 i testdataset.', 'ur': 'پیغام کے ماشین کی کمپریشن ایک طبیعی طبیعی زبان پریشینگ کا کام ہے جو ایک غلطی چال رہتا ہے. یہ کاغذ ہے کہ SemEval-2018 کے کام 11 کو حل کرنا ہے، کمنسیس علم کا کام استعمال کرتا ہے، ماشین کمپرنسی۔ ہم اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے عمیق سیکھنے کی مدل استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے تفریق، سوال اور جواب کے ساتھ تفریق کی لکھی ہوئی کلمات بنایا ہے، زبان ابزار کے ذریعہ مطابق فکرات کو اضافہ کرنے کے بدلے. یہاں تک کہ ہم ایک سری فرمورک استعمال کرتے ہیں جیسے سی ان ان کی موڈل، LSTM موڈل، LSTM کے ذریعہ موڈل اور biLSTM کے ذریعہ لکھنے کے لئے لکھ ویکتور کے ذریعہ موڈل کے ساتھ۔ آزمائش دوسرے موڈل کے مقابلہ میں بیلس ٹیم کے بہترین عملکرد کو دکھاتے ہیں۔ ہم نے اچھی فرکانسی کلمات کو بھی مٹا دیا اور کلمات ویکتور اور ڈیٹا افزایش طریقے کو جمع کیا، ایک قسم کے اثر پہنچ گئے۔ ہم نے رسمی نتیجے میں 6م رقم کی پیشنهاد کی ہے، جس کی دقیق رقم 0.7437 کی تست ڈیٹ سٹ میں ہے.', 'uz': "Name Name Biz muammolarni o'rganish modelini ishlatamiz. @ info: whatsthis Shunday paytda, biz CNN modeli, LSTM modeli, paydo modeli va biLSTM kabi bir necha freymlar bilan foydalanamiz. Keyingi soʻzni vektorga harakat qilish modeli bilan foydalanamiz. Name Biz ko'p freym soʻzlarini olib tashlash va so'zlar vektori va maʼlumot soʻzlashtirish usullarini birlashtiramiz, bir necha effektga erishib keldik. Биз ҳукумат натижаларидаги 6 марта таржима қилган қонун, саноқли маълумотлар тўғрисида 0.7437 жиҳатидан 0.7437 даражаси аниқ.", 'vi': 'Bản hiểu tổng hợp của văn bản là một công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên điển hình mà vẫn là một thách thức khó nắm bắt. Tờ giấy này dùng để giải quyết Nhiệm vụ 11 của Semkhai-thẩm 8, Machine Compention using Commonsy Knowledge task. Chúng tôi dùng phương pháp học sâu để giải quyết vấn đề. Chúng tôi xây dựng từ phân phối văn bản, câu hỏi và trả lời, thay vì tự khai thác các tính năng bằng các công cụ ngôn ngữ. Trong khi đó, chúng tôi sử dụng một loạt các cấu trúc như kiểu CNN, mô hình LSTM, LSD với mô hình tập trung và biaLSTM với mô hình tập trung để xử lý các Từ vector. Các thử nghiệm cho thấy hiệu quả cao hơn của biLSTM với bộ phận tập trung so với các mẫu khác. Chúng tôi cũng xóa các từ tần số cao và kết hợp các phương pháp khuếch đại từ và dữ liệu, đạt được một hiệu ứng nhất định. Cách tiếp cận hàng thứ sáu theo kết quả chính thức, với tỉ lệ chính xác 0.747 trong bộ dữ liệu thử.', 'nl': 'Machine Begrijpen van tekst is een typische Natural Language Processing taak die een ongrijpbare uitdaging blijft. Dit document is om de taak 11 van SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension met behulp van Commonsense Knowledge taak op te lossen. We gebruiken deep learning model om het probleem op te lossen. We bouwen gedistribueerde woordinbedding van respectievelijk tekst, vraag en antwoord in plaats van handmatig functies te extraheren door taalkundige tools. Ondertussen gebruiken we een reeks kaders zoals CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM met aandacht model en biLSTM met aandacht model voor het verwerken van woordvector. Experimenten demonstreren de superieure prestaties van biLSTM met attentie framework in vergelijking met andere modellen. We verwijderen ook hoogfrequente woorden en combineren woordvector en data augmentatie methoden, bereikt een bepaald effect. De door ons voorgestelde aanpak staat 6e in officiële resultaten, met nauwkeurigheid van 0.7437 in testdataset.', 'hr': 'Mašinska komprehenzija teksta je tipičan prirodni zadatak procesiranja jezika koji ostaje neizbježni izazov. Ovaj papir je riješiti zadatak 11 od semiEval-2018, komprenzija mašine koristeći zadatak znanja Commonsense. Koristimo model dubokog učenja da riješimo problem. Izgradili smo raspodjeljene riječi uključujući tekst, pitanje i odgovor, umjesto ručno izvlačenja karakteristika jezičkim alatima. U međuvremenu, koristimo niz okvira poput CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM s pažnjom model i biLSTM s pažnjom model za obradivanje riječnog vektora. Eksperimenti pokazuju nadmoćnu funkciju biLSTM-a s pažnjom u usporedbi s drugim modelima. Također smo izbrisali riječi visoke frekvencije i kombinirali riječne vektore i metode povećanja podataka, postigli određeni učinak. Pristup koji smo predložili 6. reda u službenim rezultatima, s preciznošću 0,7437 u testnom setu podataka.', 'da': 'Maskinforståelse af tekst er en typisk Natural Language Processing opgave, som forbliver en flygtig udfordring. Denne opgave er at løse opgaven 11 i SemEval-2018, Maskinforståelse ved hjælp af Commonsense Knowledge opgave. Vi bruger deep learning model til at løse problemet. Vi bygger distribueret ordindlejring af henholdsvis tekst, spørgsmål og svar i stedet for manuelt at udtrække funktioner ved hjælp af sproglige værktøjer. I mellemtiden bruger vi en række rammer som CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM med opmærksomhedsmodel og biLSTM med opmærksomhedsmodel til behandling af ordvektor. Eksperimenter viser den overlegne ydeevne af biLSTM med opmærksomhedsramme sammenlignet med andre modeller. Vi sletter også højfrekvente ord og kombinerer ord vektor og data augmentation metoder, opnået en vis effekt. Den fremgangsmåde, vi foreslog, rangerer 6. i officielle resultater, med nøjagtighedsgrad på 0,7437 i testdatasæt.', 'bg': 'Машинното разбиране на текста е типична задача за обработка на естествен език, която остава неуловимо предизвикателство. Настоящата статия е за решаване на задача 11 на задачата Разбиране на машините с помощта на Общо разумно знание. Използваме модел на дълбоко обучение, за да решим проблема. Ние изграждаме разпределени думи вграждане на текст, въпроси и отговори съответно вместо ръчно извличане на функции чрез лингвистични инструменти. В същото време използваме серия от рамки като модел на ЦНС, модел на ЛСТМ, модел на ЛСТМ с внимание и модел на внимание за обработка на текстов вектор. Експериментите демонстрират превъзходната производителност на биЛСТМ с рамка за внимание в сравнение с други модели. Също така изтриваме високочестотни думи и комбинираме методи за увеличаване на вектора на думи и данни, постигаме определен ефект. Подходът, който предложихме, е 6-ти в официалните резултати, с точност 0.7437 в тестовия набор от данни.', 'de': 'Das maschinelle Verständnis von Text ist eine typische Aufgabe der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache, die nach wie vor eine schwer fassbare Herausforderung darstellt. Dieses Papier soll die Aufgabe 11 von SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge Task lösen. Wir verwenden Deep Learning Modell, um das Problem zu lösen. Wir bauen verteilte Worteinbettung von Text, Frage und Antwort, anstatt Features manuell mit linguistischen Tools zu extrahieren. Unterdessen verwenden wir eine Reihe von Frameworks wie CNN-Modell, LSTM-Modell, LSTM mit Aufmerksamkeitsmodell und biLSTM mit Aufmerksamkeitsmodell für die Verarbeitung von Textvektoren. Experimente zeigen die überlegene Leistung von biLSTM mit Aufmerksamkeitsrahmen im Vergleich zu anderen Modellen. Wir löschen auch hochfrequente Wörter und kombinieren Wortvektor- und Datenerweiterungsmethoden, erzielten einen bestimmten Effekt. Der von uns vorgeschlagene Ansatz rangiert sechster in den offiziellen Ergebnissen, mit einer Genauigkeit von 0.7437 im Testdatensatz.', 'id': 'Mesin Memahami teks adalah tugas Proses Bahasa Alam yang tipis yang tetap tantangan yang tidak jelas. Kertas ini untuk memecahkan tugas 11 dari SemEval-2018, Pemahaman Mesin menggunakan tugas Pengetahuan Komunis. Kami menggunakan model belajar dalam untuk memecahkan masalah. We build distributed word embedding of text, question and answering respectively instead of manually extracting features by linguistic tools.  Sementara itu, kami menggunakan serangkaian bingkai seperti model CNN, model LSTM, LSTM dengan model perhatian dan biLSTM dengan model perhatian untuk memproses vektor kata. Eksperimen menunjukkan prestasi superior biLSTM dengan rangka perhatian dibandingkan dengan model lain. Kami juga menghapus kata-kata frekuensi tinggi dan menggabungkan vektor kata dan metode peningkatan data, mencapai efek tertentu. pendekatan yang kami sarankan tingkat 6 dalam hasil resmi, dengan tingkat akurasi 0,7437 dalam set data tes.', 'sw': 'Kamati ya kompyuta ya maandishi ni kazi ya mchakato wa lugha ya asili ambayo bado ni changamoto isiyo na maana. Gazeti hili ni kutatua jukumu la 11 la SemEval-2018, Uboreshaji wa Mashiniki kwa kutumia kazi ya Ujuzi wa Mataifa. Tunatumia muundo wa kujifunza kwa kina ili kutatua tatizo. Tunajenga neno lililosambazwa kwa ujumbe wa maandishi, maswali na kujibu kwa namna fulani badala ya kuondoa vipengele vya lugha kwa mikononi. Wakati huo huo, tunatumia mfululizo wa miundombinu kama vile CNN model, Mradi wa LSTM, LSTM akiwa na muundo wa ufuatiliaji na biLSTM akiwa na muundo wa makini kwa ajili ya kutengeneza vector ya neno. Majaribio yanaonyesha ufanisi wa ubora wa biLSTM ukiwa na mfumo wa makini ukilinganishwa na mifano mingine. Pia tunafuta maneno ya kiwango kikubwa na kuunganisha vector ya maneno na njia za kuongeza data, ilipata athari fulani. Toleo tulilopendekeza daraja la 6 katika matokeo rasmi, kwa kiwango sahihi cha 0.7437 katika seti ya taarifa za jaribio.', 'fa': 'تغییرات ماشین متن یک کار پردازش زبان طبیعی معمولی است که یک چالش بی\u200cنیاز باقی ماند. این کاغذ برای حل کار ۱۱ از نیمه Eval-۲۰۰۸ است که با استفاده از کار دانش کمپنس است. ما از مدل یادگیری عمیق برای حل مشکل استفاده می کنیم. ما کلمه\u200cهای پراکنده\u200cای از متن، سوال و جواب\u200cهای مختلف به جای استخراج ویژه\u200cهای دستی با ابزار زبان\u200cشناسی ساختیم. در ضمن، ما از مجموعهٔ فرم\u200cهای مانند مدل CNN، مدل LSTM، LSTM با مدل توجه و biLSTM با مدل توجه برای پرداخت ویکتور کلمه استفاده می\u200cکنیم. تجربه\u200cها عملکرد بالاترین بیل\u200cس\u200cتی\u200cم را با چهارچوب توجه در مقایسه با مدل\u200cهای دیگر نشان می\u200cدهند. ما همچنین کلمات فرکانس بالا را حذف می\u200cکنیم و روش افزایش داده\u200cها و ویکتور کلمات را ترکیب می\u200cکنیم، تاثیر خاص را به دست آوردیم. طریقی که ما پیشنهاد کردیم درجه ششمین در نتیجه رسمی با درجه دقیق 0.7437 در مجموعه داده\u200cهای آزمایش.', 'ko': '텍스트의 기계적 이해는 전형적인 자연 언어 처리 임무로 여전히 파악하기 어려운 도전이다.본고는SemEval-2018의 임무11을 해결하고 상식지식을 사용하는 기계이해 임무를 해결하기 위한 것이다.우리는 심도 있는 학습 모형을 사용하여 이 문제를 해결한다.우리는 언어 도구를 통해 수동으로 특징을 추출하는 것이 아니라 텍스트, 문제, 대답의 분포식 단어 삽입을 구축했다.또한 CNN 모델, LSTM 모델, LSTM 벨트 주의 모델과biLSTM 벨트 주의 모델 등 일련의 구조를 사용하여 단어의 벡터를 처리합니다.실험에 따르면 주의 프레임을 기반으로 하는 biLSTM은 다른 모델에 비해 성능이 더 좋은 것으로 나타났다.우리는 또한 고주파 단어를 삭제하고 어향량과 데이터 강화 방법을 결합시켜 어느 정도 효과를 거두었다.우리가 제시한 방법은 공식 결과 6위, 테스트 데이터 집중의 정확도는 0.7437이다.', 'tr': "Metin üçin janlaşdyrma adatça tebigy dil işlemek täblisasidir. Bu kagyz SemEval-2018'iň 11-nji zadyny çözmek üçin, Maşynyň birleşmesi Commonsense Bilgi görevini ulanýar. Meseläni çözmek üçin derin öwrenmek nusgyny ulanýarys. Biz metin, sorag we jogap edip, dil esbaplary tarapyndan elimizden çykarmak yerine paýlaşdyk sözleri düzenledik. Bu arada, CNN modeli, LSTM modeli, LSTM üns modi bilen we biLSTM söz vektöri işlemek üçin üns modi bilen birnäçe çeräw sanlaryny ulanýarys. Testler biLSTM'iň üst täsirini başga modellere görä üns çerçevesi bilen görkezilýändir. Biz de yüksek frekans sözleri silip, kelime vektörü ve veri yükseltme yöntemlerini birleştirdik ve belli etkisi elde ettik. Biz resmi netijelerde 6-nji derejä tassyklandyrýarys, munuň derejesi 0.7437 derejä.", 'af': "Masjien Kompresie van teks is 'n tipiese Natuurlike Taal Verwerking taak wat oorblyf 'n elusiewe uitdrukking. Hierdie papier is om die taak 11 van SemEval-2018 te los, Masjienkomprehensie gebruik Commonsense kennis taak. Ons gebruik diep leer model om die probleem te los. Ons bou verspreidige woord inbêring van teks, vraag en antwoord respektief in plaas van hand uitpak funksies deur lingwisiese nutsprogramme. Ons gebruik 'n reeks raamwerke soos CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM met aanmerking model en biLSTM met aanmerking model vir verwerking van woord vektor. Eksperimente vertoon die superior prestasie van biLSTM met aandag raamwerk vergelyk met ander modele. Ons het ook hoë frekwensiewoorde uitgevee en woord vektor en data augmentasie metodes gekombineer en 'n sekere effek bereik. Die toegang wat ons voorgestel het, rang 6de in offisiele resultate, met presisiteit waarde 0,7437 in toets datastel.", 'hy': 'Տեքստի մեքենայի ընկալումը բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ խնդիր է, որը շարունակում է անհնար մարտահրավեր: Այս թերթի նպատակն է լուծել "ՍեմԷվալ 2018"-ի 11-ը, Մեքենայի ընկալումը\' օգտագործելով համայնական գիտելիքների խնդիրը: Մենք օգտագործում ենք խորը սովորելու մոդելը խնդիրը լուծելու համար: Մենք կառուցում ենք տեքստի, հարցերի և պատասխանների բառերի տարածված ներառման փոխարեն լեզվաբանական գործիքների միջոցով առանձնահատկություններ ձեռք բերելու փոխարեն: Միևնույն ժամանակ, մենք օգտագործում ենք մի շարք շրջաններ, ինչպիսիք են CNN մոդելը, LSMT մոդելը, LSMT ուշադրության մոդելը և բիLSMT, ուշադրության մոդելը բառերի վեկտորի վերաբերյալ: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ բիԼՍԹՄ-ի լավագույն արդյունքը ուշադրության շրջանակներով համեմատած այլ մոդելների հետ: Մենք նաև վերացնում ենք բարձր հաճախականության բառերը և համադրում ենք բառերի վեկտոր և տվյալների աճի մեթոդներ, հասնում ենք որոշակի ազդեցության: Մենք առաջարկեցինք 6-րդ դասակարգը պաշտոնական արդյունքների մեջ, որի ճշգրտության արագությունը 0.7437 է փորձարկման տվյալների համակարգում:', 'sq': 'Komprehja e tekstit nga makina është një detyrë tipike e procesimit të gjuhës natyrore që mbetet një sfidë e qartë. Ky dokument është për të zgjidhur detyrën 11 të SemEval-2018, Komprehimin e Makinës duke përdorur detyrën e njohurive të përbashkëta. Ne përdorim modelin e mësimit të thellë për të zgjidhur problemin. Ne ndërtojmë fjalë të shpërndarë të integrimit të tekstit, pyetjeve dhe përgjigjeve respektivisht në vend të nxjerrjes manuale të funksioneve nga mjetet gjuhësore. Ndërkohë, ne përdorim një seri kornizash të tilla si model CNN, model LSTM, LSTM me model vëmendje dhe biLSTM me model vëmendje për procesimin e vektorit të fjalës. Eksperimentet demonstrojnë performancën më të lartë të biLSTM me kuadrin e vëmendjes krahasuar me modele të tjerë. Ne gjithashtu eleminojmë fjalët e frekuencës së lartë dhe kombinojmë vektorin e fjalës dhe metodat e rritjes së të dhënave, arritëm një efekt të caktuar. Përqasja që propozuam rendin e gjashtë në rezultatet zyrtare, me normën e saktësisë 0.7437 në grupin e të dhënave të testit.', 'bn': 'টেক্সটের মেশিন সম্পূর্ণ করা হচ্ছে স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজ যা বিদ্যমান চ্যালেঞ্জ থাকে। This paper is to solve the task 11 of SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge task.  আমরা গভীর শিক্ষা মডেল ব্যবহার করি সমস্যার সমাধানের জন্য। আমরা ভাষাভাষী টুলের দ্বারা নিজেদের বৈশিষ্ট্য বিতরণ করার পরিবর্তে লেখা, প্রশ্ন এবং উত্তর প্রদান করি। এদিকে, আমরা সিএনএন মডেল, এলস্টিএম মডেল, এলস্টিএমএর সাথে মনোযোগ মডেল এবং বিএলস্টিএম এর মাধ্যমে মনোযোগ মডেল ব্যবহার করি শব্দ ভেক্টরের জন্য মন অন্যান্য মডেলের সাথে তুলনায় বিএলস্টিএমের সর্বোচ্চ পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে। আমরা উচ্চ ফ্রাইভেন্স শব্দ মুছে ফেলি এবং শব্দ ভেক্টর এবং তথ্য যোগাযোগের পদ্ধতি সংযুক্ত করি, নির্দিষ্ট প্রভাব অর্ আমরা সরকারি ফলাফলের ৬ম স্তরের প্রস্তাব করেছিলাম, পরীক্ষার ডাটাসেটে ০.', 'am': 'መሳሪያው የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ የተባለው የባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ፕሮግራም ስራ ነው፡፡ This paper is to solve the task 11 of SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge task.  የጥልቅ ትምህርት model መፍትሩን ለመፍታት እንጠይቃለን፡፡ በቋንቋዊ መሣሪያዎች እጃቸውን ለማውጣት ፋንታ የጽሑፍ፣ ጥያቄ እና መልስ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በዚህ ሰዓት፣ CNN ሞዴል፣ LSTM ሞዴል፣ LSTM በጥያቄ ሞዴል እና በቢልSTM በተጨማሪነት እና የቃላት vector ምሳሌ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች ከሌሎች ምሳሌዎች ጋር የሚተያየው የቢLSTM ውጤት የበለጠ ጥያቄን የሚያሳየው፡፡ እናሳድጋለን ከፍተኛ ቁጥጥር ቃላትን እናስወግዳለን እና የቃላት vector እና ዳታ አካባቢ ሥርዓት እናደርጋለን፣ የተወሰነ ውጤት አግኝተናል፡፡ የሥርዓት ውጤቶች 6ኛ ደረጃን ለመዘጋጀት፣ የሥርዓት ውጤት 0.', 'bs': 'Mašinska kompresija teksta je tipičan zadatak procesiranja prirodnog jezika koji ostaje neizbježni izazov. Ovaj papir je riješiti zadatak 11 od semiEval-2018, kompresija mašine koristeći zadatak za znanje Commonsense. Koristimo model dubokog učenja da riješimo problem. Izgradili smo raspodjeljene riječi uključujući tekst, pitanje i odgovor, umjesto ručno izvlačenja karakteristika jezičkim alatima. U međuvremenu, koristimo niz okvira poput CNN model a, LSTM modela, LSTM sa pažnjom modela i biLSTM sa pažnjom modelom za obradivanje vektora riječi. Eksperimenti pokazuju nadmoćnu funkciju biLSTM sa pažnjom u usporedbi s drugim modelima. Također smo izbrisali riječi visoke frekvencije i kombinirali rečne vektore i metode povećanja podataka, postigli određeni učinak. Pristup koji smo predložili 6. reda u službenim rezultatima, s preciznošću 0,7437 u testnom setu podataka.', 'cs': 'Strojové porozumění textu je typickým úkolem zpracování přirozeného jazyka, který zůstává nepolapitelnou výzvou. Tento článek má řešit úlohu 11 SemEval-2018, Porozumění strojů pomocí úlohy Commonsense Knowledge. K řešení problému používáme model hlubokého učení. Vytváříme distribuované slovo vložení textu, otázky a odpovědi, místo ručního extrahování funkcí jazykovými nástroji. Mezitím používáme řadu frameworků, jako je CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM s pozornostním modelem a biLSTM s pozornostním modelem pro zpracování textového vektoru. Experimenty demonstrují vynikající výkon biLSTM s pozornostním frameworkem ve srovnání s ostatními modely. Odstraňujeme také vysokofrekvenční slova a kombinujeme metody slovního vektoru a rozšíření dat, dosáhli jsme určitého efektu. Přístup byl navržen na šestém místě v oficiálních výsledcích s rychlostí přesnosti 0.7437 v testovacím datovém souboru.', 'az': "Mətnin makinelərin kompromisyonu tipik təbiətli dil işləməsi işidir ki, həqiqətən də, çətinliksiz bir döyüşdür. Bu kağıt, SemEval-2018-nin 11-ini çəkməkdir, Commonsense Bilgi Gözəli Gözəli Gözəli Gözəli Gözəli Gözəli Makina Kompönsiyonu istifadə etməkdir. Biz problemi çəkmək üçün derin öyrənmə modelini istifadə edirik. Biz məktub, sual və cavab vermək üçün dağıtılmış sözləri dil vasitələrindən əl çəkilmək yerində elmi vasitələrindən istifadə edirik. Bu arada, CNN modeli, LSTM modeli, LSTM modeli və biLSTM məlumatları ilə söz vektoru işləmək üçün dikkati modeli ilə istifadə edirik. Təşviyyələr biLSTM'nin üstün performansını digər modellərlə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün gözləmə framework ü ilə göstərir. Biz həmçinin yüksək frekans sözləri silib söz vektoru və veri artırma metodlarını birləşdiririk, belə bir effekt oldu. Bizim təklif etdiyimiz 6. dərəcə resmi sonuçlarında, sınama verilənlərin dərəcəsi 0.7437 dərəcəsi ilə.", 'ca': "La comprensió màquina del text és una tasca típica de processament de llenguatges naturals que encara és un repte elusiv. Aquest paper és per resoldre la tasca 11 de SemEval-2018, Comprehension de màquines utilitzant la tasca de Conexos Comunes. Utilitzem un model d'aprenentatge profund per resoldre el problema. Construim paraules distribuïdes incorporant text, preguntes i respostes respectivament en lloc d'extrair característiques manualment amb eines lingüístices. Mentrestant, utilitzem una sèrie d'marcs com el model CNN, el model LSTM, LSTM amb model d'atenció i biLSTM amb model d'atenció per processar vector de paraules. Els experiments demostren el rendiment superior del biLSTM amb marc d'atenció comparat amb altres models. També eliminam paraules d'alta freqüència i combinam mètodes de vector de paraules i augment de dades, aconseguint un cert efecte. L'enfocament que vam proposar va ser al 6è rangen els resultats oficials, amb una tasa de precisió de 0,7437 en el conjunt de dades de prova.", 'et': 'Teksti masin mõistmine on tüüpiline loodusliku keele töötlemise ülesanne, mis jääb põgenematuks väljakutseks. Käesolev töö on lahendada ülesanne 11 SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge ülesanne. Probleemi lahendamiseks kasutame sügavõppe mudelit. Ehitame vastavalt teksti, küsimuste ja vastuste jaotatud sõnade manuaalse ekstraheerimise asemel keeletööriistadega. Samal ajal kasutame rea raamistikke nagu CNN mudel, LSTM mudel, LSTM tähelepanu mudel ja biLSTM tähelepanu mudel sõnavaktori töötlemiseks. Eksperimentid näitavad, et biLSTM-i tähelepanu raamistiku abil on teiste mudelitega võrreldes parem jõudlus. Samuti kustutame kõrgsageduslikud sõnad ja kombineerime sõnavaktori ja andmete suurendamise meetodid, saavutasime teatud efekti. Me pakkusime välja 6. koha ametlikes tulemustes, täpsuse määraga 0,7437 testiandmetes.', 'fi': 'Tekstin koneymmärtäminen on tyypillinen luonnollinen kielen prosessointitehtävä, joka on edelleen vaikeasti tavoiteltava haaste. Tämän artikkelin tarkoituksena on ratkaista tehtävä 11 SemEval-2018, Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. Käytämme syväoppimisen mallia ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Rakennamme hajautetun sanaupotuksen tekstistä, kysymyksestä ja vastauksesta sen sijaan, että poimimme ominaisuuksia manuaalisesti kielellisillä työkaluilla. Samalla käytämme sarjaa kehyksiä, kuten CNN-mallia, LSTM-mallia, LSTM-mallia tarkkaavaisuusmallilla ja biLSTM-mallia tarkkaavaisuusmallilla tekstivektorin käsittelyyn. Kokeet osoittavat biLSTM:n paremman suorituskyvyn huomiokehyksellä verrattuna muihin malleihin. Poistamme myös korkean taajuuden sanoja ja yhdistämme sanavektorin ja datan lisäämismenetelmiä, saavutimme tietyn vaikutuksen. Ehdotettu lähestymistapa sijoittuu 6. sijalle virallisissa tuloksissa, tarkkuus 0,7437 testiaineistossa.', 'ha': "@ info: tooltip @ info Tuna amfani da misali mai ƙari wa'azi dõmin mu sola mataimaki. We build distributed word embedding of text, question and answering respectively instead of manually extracting features by linguistic tools.  A lokacin da Muke amfani da wasu firam masu kama da misalin CNN, misalin LSSM, da misalin muhalli na LSSM da misalin muhalli da biLSM kuma da samun muhalli wa masu amfani da shiryarwa wa shiryarwa. Fijaroyi na nuna mafiya kyauta ga biLSM da firam masu kiyãya da sami'a sami da wasu misãlai. Kayya, za'a goge magana masu sarrafa sauri kuma, muna haɗi shiryoyin ayuka da shiryoyin ayuka da data, za'a sami wani amfani da. Tsarin da muka gabatar da daraja 6 a cikin fassaran rasmi, da tsari na 0.7437 a cikin tsarin database.", 'sk': 'Strojno razumevanje besedila je tipična naloga obdelave naravnega jezika, ki ostaja izmuzljiv izziv. Ta prispevek je namenjen rešitvi naloge 11 SemEval-2018, Strojno razumevanje z uporabo naloge Commonsense Knowledge. Za reševanje problema uporabljamo model globokega učenja. Namesto ročnega izvlečevanja funkcij z jezikovnimi orodji gradimo porazdeljeno besedno vdelavo besedila, vprašanj in odgovorov. Medtem uporabljamo vrsto ogrodij, kot so CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM model s pozornostjo in biLSTM model s pozornostjo za obdelavo besedilnega vektorja. Eksperimenti dokazujejo vrhunsko zmogljivost biLSTM z okvirom pozornosti v primerjavi z drugimi modeli. Prav tako izbrišemo visokofrekvenčne besede in združujemo besedni vektor in metode povečanja podatkov, dosegli smo določen učinek. Pristop smo predlagali 6. mesto v uradnih rezultatih, s stopnjo natančnosti 0,7437 v testnem naboru podatkov.', 'bo': 'མ་ལག་གི་ཆ་མཉམ་སྦྱོར་རྟགས་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཞིག འདིའི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་SemEval-2018 ཡིག་ཆའི་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལས་གནད་སྡུད་ས11ཡིན་ཐབས་ཤེས་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དེ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག Meanwhile, we use a series of frameworks such as CNN model, LSTM model, LSTM with attention model and biLSTM with attention model for processing word vector. Experiments demonstrate the superperformance of biLSTM with attention framework compared to other models. ང་ཚོས་ཨང་ཚད་མཐོ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདོར་བ་དང་ཐུག་འཕྲུལ་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ཚོར་བ ངེད་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་འབྲི་ཚིག་གཞུང་ཚབ་གྱི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་འགྲོ་སྟངས་ལྡན་༦པ་དང་།', 'jv': 'System This paper is to Resolve the task 11 of seminval-2008, Device Comprerension Using a Common License task. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing ngguyu barang nggawe gerakan seneng ngéwangi kesempatan. Awak dhéwé nggawe perintah gambaran seneng nggawe tèks, kesempatan lan uga sawar gantiné manut kanggo ngilangno alat sing jênêmêr. Taning Name We tamben delete deep-rate words and combine word vector and data agement Methods, success Ndheke awak dhéwé ngerasah tanggal 6 ing pancen offisisi dadi, dadi ngapakaké 0.', 'he': 'המכונה מבינה את הטקסט היא משימה טיפוסית של מעבדת שפת טבעית אשר נשארת אתגר בלתי ברור. הנייר הזה הוא לפתור את המשימה 11 של SemEval-2018, הבנה מכונת בשימוש משימה ידע משותף. We use deep learning model to solve the problem.  We build distributed word embedding of text, question and answering respectively instead of manually extracting features by linguistic tools.  בינתיים, אנחנו משתמשים בסדרה של מבנים כמו דוגמנית CNN, דוגמנית LSTM, LSTM עם דוגמנית תשומת לב ו-biLSTM עם דוגמנית תשומת לב עבור מעבדת ווקטור מילים. Experiments demonstrate the superior performance of biLSTM with attention framework compared to other models.  אנחנו גם מחלקים מילים תדירות גבוהה ושלבים את ווקטור המילים ושיטות גידול נתונים, השיגו אפקט מסוים. הגישה שהצענו את הדרגה השישית בתוצאות רשמיות, עם קצב מדויק 0.7437 בסט נתונים.'}
{'en': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11 : Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'ar': 'MITER في SemEval-2018 المهمة 11: استدلال العموم بدون معرفة المشاع', 'pt': 'MITRE no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 11: Raciocínio de Senso Comum sem Conhecimento de Senso Comum', 'es': 'MITRE en SemEval-2018 Tarea 11: Razonamiento de sentido común sin conocimiento de sentido común', 'fr': 'MITRE à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 11\xa0: Raisonnement de bon sens sans connaissances de bon sens', 'ja': 'MITRE at SemEval -2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 11 पर MITRE: कॉमनसेंस ज्ञान के बिना कॉमनसेंस रीजनिंग', 'zh': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 任11:无常识推理', 'ru': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Задача 11: Общепринятые рассуждения без общепринятых знаний', 'ga': 'MITER ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Réasúnaíocht Commonsense gan Eolas Commonsense', 'ka': 'MITRE semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 11: Commonsense მიზეზი საზოგადოება', 'el': 'Εργασία 11: Κοινή Λογιστική χωρίς Κοινή Γνώση', 'hu': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reaching without Commonsense Knowledge', 'it': 'MITRE a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Ragionare il Commonsense senza conoscenza del Commonsense', 'lt': 'MITRE 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 11 užduotis: bendras pagrindimas be bendrų žinių', 'kk': 'MITRE at semiEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'mk': 'MITRE на SemEval-2018 задача 11: Заедничко размислување без заедничко знаење', 'ms': 'MITRE di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Reasoning umum tanpa Pengetahuan umum', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 11: കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് അറിവില്ലാതെ വായിക്കുന്ന കമ്പന്\u200dസിന്\u200dസ് വായിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'mn': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'no': 'MITRE at semiEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'pl': 'MITRE na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 11: Rozumowanie powszechne bez wiedzy o powszechnym sensie', 'ro': 'MITRE la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 11: Raționarea bunurilor fără cunoștințe bunurilor', 'sr': 'MITRE na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11:', 'si': 'MITRE at semeval-2018 Job 11: Comsenses Reasoning Without', 'sv': 'MITRE på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 11: Samförståndsresonemang utan Samförståndskunskap', 'so': "MITRE at SemEval-2018 Shaqada 11: Readmada dhameysashada aqoonta xirfadeedka la'aanta", 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 11: தொடர்பு அறிவு இல்லாமல் வாசிக்கப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'uz': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'vi': 'CÔ CHIM ÉT Semkhai-thẩm 8 Task 11: Lý lẽ thường mà không có kiến thức thông thường', 'bg': 'Задача 11: Общо разумно разсъждаване без общо знание', 'da': 'MITRE på SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Commonsense Resourcing without Commonsense Knowledge', 'hr': 'MITRE na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11:', 'nl': 'MITRE op SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Grondstoffelijke Redenen zonder Grondstoffelijke Kennis', 'de': 'MITRE bei SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning ohne Commonsense Knowledge', 'fa': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 미션11: 상식지식이 없는 상식추리', 'sw': 'MITRE katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 11: Mabaliano yasiyo na ufahamu wa umma', 'tr': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'af': 'MITRE by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 11: Commonsense Reasoning sonder Commonsense Knowledge', 'sq': 'MITRE në SemEval-2018 Çështja 11: Arsyeja e përbashkët pa njohuri të përbashkët', 'am': 'ስራ 11:', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১১-এ মিট্রি: কমিনসেন্সের জ্ঞান ছাড়া কমিনসেন্স প্রতিক্রিয়া', 'az': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge', 'id': 'MITRE di SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Reasoning umum tanpa Pengetahuan umum', 'bs': 'MITRE na semiEval-2018 zadatku 11:', 'ca': 'MITRE a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Reasoning Commons Without Commonsent Knowledge', 'cs': 'MITRE na SemEval-2018 Úkol 11: Zdravotní rozumování bez znalostí Commonsense', 'et': 'MITRE SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 11: Üldmõistmine ilma Üldmõistlike teadmisteta', 'fi': 'MITRE SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 11: Commonsense Racing without Commonsense Knowledge', 'hy': 'MITre-ը 2018-ի կիսագնդի 11-ի առաջադրանքում. համայնական պատճառը առանց համայնական գիտելիքների', 'jv': 'paper size', 'sk': 'MITRE na SemEval-2018 naloga 11: Splošno razumevanje brez splošnega znanja', 'he': 'MITRE ב SemEval-2018 משימה 11: הגיון משותף ללא ידע משותף', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'MITRE at SemEval-2018 Task 11: Commonsense Reasoning without Commonsense Knowledge'}
{'en': 'This paper describes MITRE’s participation in SemEval-2018 Task 11 : Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. The techniques explored range from simple bag-of-ngrams classifiers to neural architectures with varied attention and alignment mechanisms. Logistic regression ties the systems together into an ensemble submitted for evaluation. The resulting system answers reading comprehension questions with 82.27 % accuracy.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a participação do MITRE na Tarefa 11 do SemEval-2018: Compreensão da Máquina usando o Conhecimento Comum. As técnicas exploradas vão desde classificadores simples de bag-of-ngrams até arquiteturas neurais com atenção variada e mecanismos de alinhamento. A regressão logística une os sistemas em um conjunto submetido à avaliação. O sistema resultante responde a perguntas de compreensão de leitura com 82,27% de precisão.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la participation de MITRE à SEMEVAL-2018 Task 11\xa0: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. Les techniques explorées vont des simples classificateurs de sacs de ngrammes aux architectures neuronales avec des mécanismes d'attention et d'alignement variés. La régression logistique lie les systèmes dans un ensemble soumis pour évaluation. Le système qui en résulte répond aux questions de compréhension écrite avec une précision de 82,27\xa0%.", 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركة MITRE في مهمة SemEval-2018 11: فهم الآلة باستخدام معرفة Commonsense. تتراوح التقنيات التي تم استكشافها من المصنفات البسيطة للحقائب إلى البنى العصبية ذات الاهتمام المتنوع وآليات المحاذاة. يربط الانحدار اللوجستي الأنظمة معًا في مجموعة تخضع للتقييم. النظام الناتج يجيب على أسئلة الفهم المقروء بدقة 82.27٪.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe la participación de MITRE en la Tarea 11 de SemEval-2018: Comprensión de máquinas mediante el conocimiento de sentido común. Las técnicas exploradas van desde simples clasificadores de bolsas de ngramas hasta arquitecturas neuronales con diversos mecanismos de atención y alineación. La regresión logística une los sistemas en un conjunto presentado para su evaluación. El sistema resultante responde a las preguntas de comprensión lectora con una precisión del 82,27%.', 'zh': '本文述MITRE与SemEval-2018务11:用常识机器解。 求术自简袋数ngram分类器至有异意,与齐机之神经架构。 逻辑归将系统相连,成一提交评估之会。 由是统以82.27%准确率对。', 'ja': 'この論文では、MITREのSemEval -2018 Task 11: Machine Understanding using Commonsense Knowledgeへの参加について説明する。探求されたテクニックは、単純なバッグオブナム分類器から、様々な注意とアライメントのメカニズムを持つニューラルアーキテクチャまで多岐にわたる。ロジスティック回帰は、システムを評価のために提出されたアンサンブルに結び付けます。結果として得られるシステムは、82.27 ％の精度で理解度の問題に答えます。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 कार्य 11 में MITRE की भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है: Commonsense Knowledge का उपयोग करके मशीन समझ। खोजी गई तकनीकों में सरल बैग-ऑफ-एनग्राम क्लासिफायर्स से लेकर विभिन्न ध्यान और संरेखण तंत्र के साथ तंत्रिका आर्किटेक्चर तक शामिल हैं। लॉजिस्टिक प्रतिगमन मूल्यांकन के लिए प्रस्तुत एक पहनावा में सिस्टम को एक साथ जोड़ता है। परिणामी प्रणाली 82.27% सटीकता के साथ पढ़ने के समझ के सवालों का जवाब देती है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается участие MITRE в задаче 11 SemEval-2018: машинное понимание с использованием знаний общего смысла. Изученные методы варьируются от простых классификаторов мешков-грамм до нейронных архитектур с различным вниманием и механизмами выравнивания. Логистическая регрессия объединяет системы в единый комплекс, представляемый для оценки. Полученная система отвечает на вопросы о понимании чтения с точностью 82,27%.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar rannpháirtíocht MITRE i SemEval-2018 Tasc 11: Tuiscint Inneall ag baint úsáide as Commonsense Knowledge. I measc na dteicníochtaí a scrúdaíodh tá aicmitheoirí simplí mála de ngramanna go hailtireachtaí néaracha le meicníochtaí éagsúla airde agus ailínithe. Ceanglaíonn aischéimniú lóistíochta na córais le chéile in ensemble a chuirtear isteach le haghaidh meastóireachta. Freagraíonn an córas mar thoradh ar cheisteanna léamhthuisceana le cruinneas 82.27%.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი გამოსახულებს MITRE-ის დაწყვეტილება SemEval-2018 დავალებში 11: მაქსინური კომპრენცია, რომელიც Commonsense Knowledge გამოყენებული. ტექნოგიები განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული ინგრამის კლასიფიკაციებიდან ნეირალური არქტიქტურებისთვის განსხვავებული ინტექნოცია და განსხვავებული მექანციებისთვის. ლოგისტიკური რეგრესია სისტემების ერთად გადაყენება განსაზღვრებისთვის ანსტემბელში. შემდეგ სისტემის შესაძლებლობით გაუკეთებს კითხვის კითხვების შესახებ 82,27% წესია.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή του ΜΗΤΡΕ στο έργο 11: Κατανόηση μηχανών χρησιμοποιώντας τη γνώση κοινής λογικής. Οι τεχνικές που διερευνήθηκαν κυμαίνονται από απλούς ταξινομητές σάκου-από-γκραμ έως νευρωνικές αρχιτεκτονικές με ποικίλους μηχανισμούς προσοχής και ευθυγράμμισης. Η λογιστική παλινδρόμηση συνδέει τα συστήματα μαζί σε ένα σύνολο που υποβάλλεται για αξιολόγηση. Το σύστημα που προκύπτει απαντά σε ερωτήσεις κατανόησης ανάγνωσης με ακρίβεια 82.27% .', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a MITRE részvételét a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension használatával. A feltárt technikák az egyszerű bag-of-ngramok osztályozóktól a különböző figyelemmel és igazítási mechanizmusokkal rendelkező neurális architektúrákig terjednek. A logisztikai regresszió összekapcsolja a rendszereket egy értékelésre benyújtott együttesbe. Az így kapott rendszer 82,27%-os pontossággal válaszol az olvasásértési kérdésekre.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas MITRE dalyvavimas 2011 m. pusmečio vertinimo 11 uždavinyje „Mašin ų suvokimas naudojant bendrąsias žinias“. Tirti metodai apima nuo paprastų maišelių klasifikatorių iki nervų architektūrų su skirtingu dėmesiu ir suderinimo mechanizmais. Logistinė regresija sujungia sistemas į vertinimui pateiktą rinkinį. Atitinkama sistema atsako į supratimo klausimus skaitant 82,27 proc. tikslumu.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува учеството на МИТРЕ во SemEval-2018 задача 11: Машинско разбирање користејќи заедничко знаење. Техниките кои се истражуваат се движат од едноставни класификатори на вреќа-на-грams до нервни архитектури со различно внимание и механизми на пристапување. Логистичката регресија ги поврзува системите во ансембл поднесен за проценка. Резултатот на системот одговара на прашањата за разбирање со 82,27 отсто точност.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз MITRE жарым-2018 тапсырмасында қатынастығын 11- тапсырмасына таңдайды: Commonsense білімін қолдану машинаның құрылғысы. Техникалар кәдімгі грамм классификацияларынан невралдық архитектураларға түрлі қатынас және түрлендіру механизмтері бар. Логикалық регрессия жүйелерді бағалау үшін жіберілген ензембліне бірге байланысты. Жүйелік дұрыс 82, 27% деген сұрақтарды оқу жауап береді.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la partecipazione di MITRE a SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprension using Commonsense Knowledge. Le tecniche esplorate vanno dai semplici classificatori bag-of-ngram alle architetture neurali con vari meccanismi di attenzione e allineamento. La regressione logistica lega i sistemi in un insieme sottoposto alla valutazione. Il sistema risultante risponde alle domande di comprensione della lettura con precisione dell'82,27%.", 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-parteċipazzjoni tal-MITRE fis-SemEval-2018 Kompitu 11: Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju bl-użu tal-Għarfien Komuni. It-tekniki esplorati jvarjaw minn klassifikaturi sempliċi tal-borża tal-ngrams sa arkitetturi newrali b’attenzjoni varjata u mekkaniżmi ta’ allinjament. Ir-rigressjoni loġistika torbot is-sistemi flimkien f’ensemble sottomess għall-evalwazzjoni. Is-sistema li tirriżulta twieġeb għal mistoqsijiet ta’ fehim li jinqraw b’preċiżjoni ta’ 82.27%.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас MITRE-ийн SemEval-2018 Task 11-д оролцоог тайлбарлаж байна: Машин Төрөвдүүлэлт Commonsense Knowledge-г ашиглаж байна. Энэ техникууд энгийн грамм хэлбэрээс мэдрэлийн архитектур руу өөр төрлийн анхаарал болон тохиромжтой механизмуудыг судалсан. Логистикийн сэтгэл хөдлөл системийг дүгнэлт хийх зорилгоор нэгтгэдэг. Үүний үр дүнтэй систем нь 82.27% зөв асуултуудыг унших боломжтой.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d MITRE സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 11: കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ അറിവ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിപാലിക്കുന്നതിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കു സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നതിനും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ശ്രദ്ധകളുമായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റുകളിലേ ലോഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് റിക്രഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റങ്ങളെ ഒരുമിച്ച് വിലയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി സമര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നതിലേക്ക അതിന്റെ ഫലമായ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം 82. 27% കൃത്യമായി വായിക്കുന്നതിന് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan participasi MITRE dalam SemEval-2018 Tugas 11: Pemahaman Mesin menggunakan pengetahuan umum. Teknik yang dikeksplorasi julat dari pengklasifikasi beg-of-ngrams sederhana ke arkitektur saraf dengan perhatian berbeza dan mekanisme penyesuaian. Regresi logis mengikat sistem bersama-sama ke dalam kumpulan yang dihantar untuk penilaian. The resulting system answers reading comprehension questions with 82.27% accuracy.', 'no': 'Denne papiret skildrar MITRE s in deltakar i semiEval-2018 oppgåve 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. Teknikkene utforska området frå enkle gremmeklassifiseringar til neuralarkitekturar med varierte oppmerksområde og justeringsmekanismene. Logisk regresjon koplar systemet sammen til ein ensembel som er sendt til evaluering. Det resulterte systemet svarar på lesing av forstålsspørsmål med 82,27 % nøyaktig.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje udział MITRE w SemEval-2018 Task 11: Zrozumienie maszyn z wykorzystaniem wiedzy powszechnej. Badane techniki obejmują proste klasyfikatory bag-of-ngrams po architektury neuronowe o zróżnicowanych mechanizmach uwagi i wyróżnienia. Regresja logistyczna łączy systemy w zespół przedłożony do oceny. Powstały system odpowiada na pytania dotyczące rozumienia czytania z dokładnością 82,27% .', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie participarea MITRE la SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension folosind Commonsense Knowledge. Tehnicile explorate variază de la clasificatoare simple bag-of-ngrams la arhitecturi neurale cu atenție și mecanisme variate de aliniere. Regresia logistică leagă sistemele într-un ansamblu supus evaluării. Sistemul rezultat răspunde la întrebările de înțelegere a citirii cu o precizie de 82,27%.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje MITRE-a u zadatku 11. polovice 2018: kompresija mašine korištenjem znanja Commonsense. Tehnike su istraživale raspon od jednostavnih klasifikatora vreća ngrama do neuralne arhitekture sa različitim pažnjom i mehanizama prilagodbe. Logistička regresija povezuje sisteme zajedno u ensemble podignuto za procjenu. Rezultatni sistem odgovara na pitanja razumijevanja sa preciznošću 82,27%.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ MITRE ගේ සම්වේල් 2018 වැඩ 11 වැඩේ සම්වේල් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණය විස්තර කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විවිධ අවධානය සහ සැලසුම් බෑග්රෑම් ක්\u200dරිස්ටර්ස් වලින් සංවිධානයට පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධයක් පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියෙන පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 82.27% හරියට තියෙන්නේ.', 'so': "Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran qayb ka qaadashada MITRE SemEval-2018 shaqo 11: Machine Comprehension using isticmaalka aqoonta Commerce. Teqooyinka waxaa laga baaraandegay wadooyin fudud oo ay kala duduwan yihiin qaniinooyinka neurada, waxayna leeyihiin qalcadaha isbedelka iyo habboonaanka kala duduwan. Rugta isticmaalka wuxuu isugu wada xidhiidhiyaa nidaamka oo loo soo dhiibay qiimeynta. Isticmaalku wuxuu ka jawaabaa su'aalaha aasaasiga ah oo la akhriyey 82.27% sax ah.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver MITRE:s deltagande i SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. De tekniker som utforskats sträcker sig från enkla bag-of-ngrams klassificerare till neurala arkitekturer med varierande uppmärksamhet och justeringsmekanismer. Logistisk regression binder samman systemen till en ensemble som lämnas in för utvärdering. Det resulterande systemet besvarar läsförståelse frågor med 82,27% noggrannhet.', 'ta': "This paper describes MITRE's participation in SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge.  இந்த தொழில்நுட்பங்கள் சுலபமான பாக்-க்ராம் வகைப்பாளர்களில் இருந்து புதிய அடைவுகளுக்கு வேறு வித்தியாசமான கவனம் மற்றும் ஒழு மதிப்பீட்டிற்காக கொடுக்கப்பட்ட முனையத்தில் அமைப்புகளை ஒன்றாக சேர்க்கிறது. முடிவு அமைப்பு தொகுதி கேள்விகளை படித்து 82. 27% சரியாக பதில் அளிக்கிறது.", 'ur': "This paper describes MITRE's participation in SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. تکنیک کی مختلف توجه اور تعمیر مکانیزوں کے ساتھ سادھے بنگ-انگرم کے کلیسٹر سے مختلف مکانیزوں کے ساتھ مختلف مکانیزوں کی مختلف طریقے سے پھیری گئی۔ لوجیسٹیکی ریگریش سیستموں کو ایک مقدار کے لئے مستقل ہونے کے لئے مستقل کیا گیا ہے. نتیجہ سٹم نے 82.27% دقیق کے ساتھ پوچھنے کی سمجھ کی سؤال کی جواب دیتی ہے.", 'uz': "Name Teksiyani oddiy qismlardan tashqaruvchilarga nazar maktablariga o'zgartirdi va har xil taʼminlov va tekislash mechanislari bilan o'zgartirdi. Name @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả s ự tham gia vào Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 8 11: Tập đoàn máy sử dụng Ý thức phổ thông. Các kỹ thuật được tìm hiểu là từ những chuyên gia phân loại túi đơn giản đến kiến trúc thần kinh với các cơ quan quan chú ý khác nhau. Sự hồi phục theo logic kết hợp hệ thống thành một kết cấu được gửi đến để đánh giá. Hệ thống kết quả đáp ứng các câu hỏi thấu hiểu với độ chính xác 82.27', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва участието на МИТРЕ в Задача 11: Разбиране на машините с помощта на общоприето знание. Изследваните техники варират от прости класификатори на торбички от нграми до неврални архитектури с разнообразни механизми за внимание и подравняване. Логистичната регресия свързва системите в ансамбъл, представен за оценка. Получената система отговаря на въпросите за разбиране на четенето с 82,27% точност.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de deelname van MITRE aan SemEval-2018 Taak 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. De onderzochte technieken variëren van eenvoudige bag-of-ngrams classificatoren tot neurale architecturen met gevarieerde aandacht- en uitlijningsmechanismen. Logistische regressie verbindt de systemen tot een ensemble dat ter evaluatie wordt voorgelegd. Het resulterende systeem beantwoordt leesbegripsvragen met 82,27% nauwkeurigheid.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje učestvovanje MITRE-a u zadatku 11. polovine Evala-2018: komprehenzija strojeva koristeći znanje Commonsense. Tehnike su istražile raspon od jednostavnih klasifikatora vreća ngrama do neuralne arhitekture s različitim mehanizama pažnje i prilagodbe. Logistička regresija povezuje sustave zajedno u ensemble predan za procjenu. Rezultatni sustav odgovara na pitanja razumijevanja s preciznošću 82,27%.', 'da': "Dette papir beskriver MITRE's deltagelse i SemEval-2018 Opgave 11: Maskinforståelse ved hjælp af Commonsense Knowledge. De udforskede teknikker spænder fra simple taske-of-ngrams klassificeringer til neurale arkitekturer med varierede opmærksomheds- og justeringsmekanismer. Logistisk regression binder systemerne sammen i et ensemble, der indsendes til evaluering. Det resulterende system besvarer læseforståelsesspørgsmål med 82,27% nøjagtighed.", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die Beteiligung von MITRE an SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge. Die untersuchten Techniken reichen von einfachen Bag-of-ngrams Klassifikatoren bis hin zu neuronalen Architekturen mit unterschiedlichen Aufmerksamkeits- und Ausrichtungsmechanismen. Die logistische Regression verbindet die Systeme zu einem Ensemble, das zur Bewertung eingereicht wird. Das resultierende System beantwortet Leseverständnisfragen mit 82,27% Genauigkeit.', 'ko': '본고는 미트가 SemEval-18 임무에 참여하는 11: 상식지식을 사용하는 기계적 이해를 묘사한다.연구의 기술 범위는 간단한 ngrams 분류 패키지에서 서로 다른 주의와 정렬 메커니즘을 가진 신경 구조까지 다양하다.논리 회귀는 시스템을 연결시켜 평가를 제출하는 집합을 형성한다.이로 인해 발생한 체계적인 읽기 이해 문제에 대한 대답의 정확도는 82.27% 였다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت MITRE را توصیف می\u200cکند که در ماموریت ۱۱ مرحله ۲۰۱۸: مشارکت ماشین با استفاده از دانش کمونس. تکنیک\u200cها از کیف\u200cهای ساده\u200cی انگرام به معماری\u200cهای عصبی با مکانیسم\u200cهای توجه و تنظیم مختلف کشف کردند. تغییرات منطقی سیستم\u200cها را با هم به یک انجمن ارزیابی ارزیابی ارتباط می\u200cدهد. سیستم نتیجه جواب می دهد که در خواندن سوالات درک با دقیق 82.27 درصد درک می کند.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ushiriki wa MITRE katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 11: Matumizi ya Mashiniki kwa kutumia ujuzi wa Matukio. Teknolojia hizo zilichungua kiwango cha vifaa rahisi na vifaa vya ngome mpaka majengo ya kisasa yenye mitazamo tofauti na mfumo wa usambazaji. Udhibiti wa kimsingi unaunganisha mifumo kwa pamoja katika mfumo uliotolewa ili kutathmini. Mfumo wa matokeo unajibu kusoma maswali ya msingi kwa asilimia 82.27 ya uhakika.', 'tr': "Bu kağıt MITRE'nin SemEval-2018 Görevi 11: Maşynyň birleşmesini Commonsense Bilgi kullanarak tanyýar. Basit bir bag-of-ngrams klasifikatyndan neural arhitekturmalara çevrili üns we çykyş meýdançalary bilen gözlenýärler. Ýaglamak üçin gönderilen Logistik regressiýa sistemlere bir görkezilişi bilen birleşýär. netijäki sistemada 82.27% dogry bilen soraglary okamakda jogap berýär.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe MITRE se deelnimmering in SemEval-2018 Opdrag 11: Masjienkomprehensie gebruik Commonsense kennis. Die teknike het uitgesoek omvang van eenvoudige sak van ngrams klassifiseerders na neurale arkitektuure met verskillende aandag en alignment mekanisme. Logistiese regresie verbind die stelsels saam in 'n ensemble wat vir evaluering voorgestuur word. Die resulteerde stelsel antwoord lees verstandige vrae met 82.27% waarskynlik.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የስሜምEval-2018 ስራ 11: የመኪን እውቀት በመጠቀም የመኪን ትግባር ይናገራል፡፡ ስልጣናዎች ከቀላል የዓይነቶች አካባቢ እና የልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት እና ማሰናከል አካባቢዎች ይሄዳሉ፡፡ Logistic regression systems together to an ensemble for assessment. የውጤቱ ሲስተም የጠቅላላ ጥያቄዎችን በማንበብ 82.27 በመቶ እርግጠኛ ይመልሳል።', 'az': "Bu kağıt MITRE'nin SemEval-2018 Gözəli 11-də yer almasını təsbiq edir: Commonsense Bilgi vasitəsilə maşın komprehensiyonu. Tehniklərə bənzər dikkati və düzəltmə mehanizmiləri olan basit ngramların çantasından nöral arhitektirlərə təşkil edilmişdir. Logistik regresiya sistemləri değerlendirmək üçün göndərilən ensemble ilə birlikdə bağlayır. Növbəti sistem, 82.27% ədaləti ilə oxumağa cavab verir.", 'id': "This paper describes MITRE's participation in SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge.  The techniques explored range from simple bag-of-ngrams classifiers to neural architectures with varied attention and alignment mechanisms.  Regresi logistik menghubungkan sistem bersama-sama ke sebuah ensemble yang dipanggil untuk evaluasi. Sistem hasilnya menjawab pertanyaan pemahaman dengan akurasi 82,27%.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է MITre-ի մասնակցությունը 2018-ի կիսագնդի 11. հանրային գիտելիքի օգտագործման մեքենայի ընկալումը: Հետազոտել տեխնիկաները տարբերվում են պարզ խաղաքարտերի դասակարգումներից մինչև նյարդային ճարտարապետություններ, որոնք ունեն տարբեր ուշադրություն և հարմարեցման մեխանիզմներ: Լոգիստիկ ռեգրեսիան կապում է համակարգերը գնահատելու համար ներկայացված համակարգով: Արդյունքում ստացված համակարգը պատասխանում է ընթերցման հարցերին 82.27 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের অংশগ্রহণকারী মিটির ব্যাখ্যা করেছে: কমানসেন্সের জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে মিশিন কপ্রিনফে এই প্রযুক্তিগুলো সাধারণ ব্যাগ-অফ-গ্রামের ব্যাগ-এর ব্যাগ-ব্লাসিফারদের কাছ থেকে নিউরেল প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলোর দিকে বিভিন Logistic regression ties the systems together into an ensemble submitted for evaluation.  ফলাফল সিস্টেমের উত্তর ৮২. ২৭% সঠিকভাবে প্রশ্ন পড়ছে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje učestvovanje MITRE-a u zadatku 11. polovice 2018: kompresija mašine koristeći znanje Commonsense. Tehnike su istražile raspon od jednostavnih klasifikatora vreća ngrama do neuralne arhitekture sa različitim mehanizama pažnje i prilagodbe. Logistička regresija povezuje sisteme zajedno u ensemble podignuto za procjenu. Rezultatni sistem odgovara na pitanja razumijevanja sa preciznošću 82,27%.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la participació del MITRE en SemEval-2018 Task 11: Comprehension of Machine using Commonsense Knowledge. Les tècniques explorades van des de classificadors senzills a arquitectures neuronals amb diferents mecanismes d'atenció i alliniament. La regressió logística enllaça els sistemes en un conjunt submetit a evaluació. El sistema resultant respon llegint preguntes de comprensió amb la precisió del 82,27%.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan pjesëmarrjen e MITRE në SemEval-2018 Task 11: Comprehension Machine using Commonsense Knowledge. Tekniket e eksploruara shkojnë nga klasifikuesit e thjeshtë të çantës së ngrams deri në arkitektura nervore me vëmendje të ndryshme dhe mekanizma të përshtatjes. Regresioni logjik lidh sistemet së bashku në një ensemble të paraqitur për vlerësim. Sistemi që rezulton përgjigjet për leximin e pyetjeve të kuptimit me saktësi 82.27%.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje účast MITRE na SemEval-2018 Task 11: Porozumění strojů s využitím Commonsense Knowledge. Zkoumané techniky sahají od jednoduchých klasifikátorů bag-of-ngrams až po neuronové architektury s různými mechanismy pozornosti a zarovnání. Logistická regrese spojuje systémy do souboru předloženého k hodnocení. Výsledný systém odpovídá na otázky porozumění čtení s 82,27% přesností.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse MITRE osalemist SemEval-2018 ülesandes 11: masinate mõistmine üldteadmiste abil. Uuritud tehnikad ulatuvad lihtsatest ngrammide klassifitseerijatest kuni erinevate tähelepanu- ja joondusmehhanismidega neuroarhitektuurideni. Logistiline regressioon seob süsteemid kokku hindamiseks esitatud ansambliks. Saadud süsteem vastab lugemise mõistmise küsimustele 82,27% täpsusega.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan MITRE:n osallistumista SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge -ohjelmaan. Tutkitut tekniikat vaihtelevat yksinkertaisista bag-of-ngrams-luokittelijoista neuroarkkitehtuureihin, joissa on erilaisia huomio- ja kohdistusmekanismeja. Logistinen regressio sitoo järjestelmät yhteen arvioitavaksi jätettäväksi kokonaisuudeksi. Tuloksena oleva järjestelmä vastaa lukemisen ymmärtämiseen liittyviin kysymyksiin 82,27%:n tarkkuudella.', 'jv': "This paper describes MTRE's partition in semebal-2008 task 11: Masjid Comprerension use Common Sensitive Genjer-Genjer Relaks Sistem sing paling nggambar kapan kuwi nggambar obah-obahan nganggo perusahaan mat mungkin-obahan kanggo njuk obah obah-obahan.", 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana shirin MITRT na SemEV-2018 Tanin 11: Mashine Comprehension Use Commonsense Cilmi. Tayiniki na gane tsakanin daga masu sakan-na-ngrams zuwa matsakan neura da masu zane-zane da zane-zane-zane. Shiryarwa na Logistic ya girmama tsarin da suka haɗu zuwa wani emballa da aka samar da shi dõmin tunkuɗe. Ga ta ƙara ya jiba wa karãtun su'ura masu ƙaranci da asilimi 82.27 na gaske.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje sodelovanje MITRE v nalogi 11 SemEval-2018: Razumevanje strojev z uporabo splošnega znanja. Raziskovane tehnike segajo od preprostih klasifikatorjev vrečke ngramov do nevralnih arhitektur z različnimi mehanizmi pozornosti in poravnave. Logistična regresija povezuje sisteme v komplet, predložen v oceno. Nastali sistem odgovarja na vprašanja razumevanja branja z 82,27% natančnostjo.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את השתתפות של MITRE ב SemEval-2018 משימה 11: בינה מכונות באמצעות ידע משותף. The techniques explored range from simple bag-of-ngrams classifiers to neural architectures with varied attention and alignment mechanisms.  הגזרה לוגיסטית מחוברת את המערכות ביחד לתוך אסמבל שנשלח להערכה. המערכת הנוצאה עונה לקריאה שאלות הבנה עם מדויקת 82.27%.', 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་MITRE's participation in SemEval-2018 Task 11: Machine Comprehension using Commonsense Knowledge་དེ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ། ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་ལས་སླ་རིམ་ནང་ནས་དབུས་གཞུང་དང་བསྒྲིག་སྟངས་གཞན་དང་། དྲན་རིམ་ལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཀྱི་མཚོན་རྟགས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡིན་པ རྐྱེན་འབྲས་མ་ལག་གིས་བདེན་བཤད་ཀློག་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་དྲི་བ་ཚོར་82.27%དཔག་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།"}
{'en': 'SNU_IDS at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : Sentence Encoder with Contextualized Vectors for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'ar': 'SNU_IDS في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: أداة تشفير الجملة مع متجهات سياقية لفهم منطق الحجج', 'pt': 'SNU_IDS na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: Codificador de Sentença com Vetores Contextualizados para Compreensão de Raciocínio de Argumentos', 'es': 'SNU_IDS en la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2018: Codificador de oraciones con vectores contextualizados para la comprensión del razonamiento argumentativo', 'fr': 'SNU_IDS à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 12\xa0: Encodeur de phrase avec vecteurs contextualisés pour la compréhension du raisonnement des arguments', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のSNU_IDSタスク12 ：引数推論理解のためのコンテキスト化されたベクトルを持つ文章エンコーダ', 'zh': 'SemEval-2018务12者SNU_IDS:有参数上下文向量之句编码器', 'ru': 'SNU_IDS на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Кодер предложений с контекстуализированными векторами для понимания аргументации', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 12 पर SNU_IDS: तर्क तर्क समझ के लिए Contextualized वैक्टर के साथ वाक्य एनकोडर', 'ga': 'SNU_IDS ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: Ionchódóir Pianbhreithe le Veicteoirí Comhthéacsúla le haghaidh Tuiscint ar Réasúnaíocht Argóint', 'ka': 'QOCIResult', 'hu': 'SNU_IDS a SemEval-2018 12. feladat: mondatkódoló kontextualizált vektorokkal az argumentumok értelmezéséhez', 'el': 'Εργασία 12: Κωδικοποιητής φράσεων με περιεκτικά διανύσματα για κατανόηση επιχειρημάτων', 'it': "SNU_IDS a SemEval-2018 Task 12: Encoder di frasi con vettori contestualizzati per la comprensione della ragione dell'argomento", 'kk': 'SNU_IDS 12 тапсырмасында: Аргументтің себептерін түсіндіру құрылғысының контекстуализацияланған векторлары', 'lt': 'SNU_IDS SemEval-2018 12 užduotis: sakinių kodas su kontekstiniais veiksniais argumentams pagrįsti', 'mk': 'SNU_IDS на SemEval-2018 задача 12: Кодер на реченици со контекстни вектори за разбирање на разумот', 'ms': 'SNU_IDS pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Pengekod perkataan dengan Vektor Konteksual untuk Pemahaman Memakai Argumen', 'mt': 'SNU_IDS f’SemEval-2018 Task 12: Sentenza Encoder with Contextualized Vectors for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12- ല്\u200d SNU_ IDS: ആര്\u200dഗുമെന്റ് വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിധിയുടെ കൊണ്ട് വിധിക്കുക', 'no': 'SNU_IDS på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 12: teiknkoder med kontekstualiserte vektorar for argumentgrunnleggjande komprehension', 'mn': 'SNU_IDS at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Sentence Encoder with Contextualized Vectors for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'pl': 'SNU_IDS w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Encoder zdań z wektorami kontekstualizowanymi dla zrozumienia argumentów', 'sr': 'SNU_IDS na zadatku 12:', 'si': 'SNA_IDS at HalfEvel-2018 Job 12: Sentence Encoder with Contextuolized Vectors for Reasoning Comprebension', 'ro': 'SNU_IDS la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 12: Encoder de sentință cu vectori contextualizați pentru înțelegerea argumentelor', 'so': 'SNU_IDS at SemEval-2018 Shaqada 12: Qodeynta Sentence with Contextualized Vectors for Argument Reading', 'sv': 'SNU_IDS på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: meningskodificering med kontextualiserade vektorer för begripling av argument', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் SNU_ IDS:', 'ur': 'SNU_IDS at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Sentence Encoder with Contextualized Vectors for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 vazifa 12: Argument oʻqish uchun kattalashtirilgan vectorlar bilan maxfiy kodlash', 'vi': 'SNU IDS tại SemEvl-208 Task 12: Encoder đơn giản với Quá trình thai kết hợp cho luận về lý luận văn', 'nl': 'SNU_IDS bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Zinncoder met contextualiseerde vectoren voor het begrijpen van argumenten', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Кокодер на изречения с контекстуализирани вектори за разбиране на аргументите', 'da': 'SNU_IDS på SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Sætningskoder med kontekstualiserede vektorer til argumentbegrundelse forståelse', 'id': 'SNU_IDS di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Pengekoder kalimat dengan Vektor Konteksual untuk Memahami Argumen', 'fa': 'Name', 'hr': 'SNU_IDS na zadatku 12:', 'de': 'SNU_IDS bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 12: Satzkodierer mit kontextualisierten Vektoren zur Argumentbegründung', 'sw': 'SNU_IDS kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Kufungua hukumu kwa ajili ya Kufungua Ufungu', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 퀘스트 12의 SNU IDS: 논점 추리 이해에 사용되는 언어 환경화 벡터를 가진 문장 인코더', 'af': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'рѕхрѕЮEval-2018 рѕхрѕФ 12:', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১২-এ SNU_IDS: আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরুদ্ধারের জন্য শাস্তি এনকোডার', 'bs': 'SNU_IDS na zadatku 12:', 'tr': 'SNU_IDS at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Sentence Encoder with Contextualized Vectors for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'sq': 'SNU_IDS at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Sentence Encoder with Contextualized Vectors for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'ca': "SNU_IDS a SemEval-2018 tasca 12: codificador de sentences amb vectors contextualitzats per entendre la raonació d'arguments", 'cs': 'SNU_IDS na SemEval-2018 횣loha 12: K처dov찼n챠 v휎t s kontextualizovan첵mi vektory pro porozum휎n챠 argument킁', 'et': 'SNU_IDS SemEval-2018 ülesandel 12: lausekodeerija kontekstualiseeritud vektoritega argumentide mõistmiseks', 'fi': 'SNU_IDS SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: Lausekooderi kontekstualisoiduilla vektoreilla argumenttien järkeilyn ymmärtämistä varten', 'az': 'SNU_IDS at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Sentence Encoder with Contextualized Vectors for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'jv': 'sNU', 'sk': 'SNU_IDS na SemEval-2018 naloga 12: kodirnik stavkov s kontekstualiziranimi vektorji za razumevanje argumentov', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu', 'bo': 'SNU_IDS at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Sentence Encoder with Contextualized Vectors for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'he': 'SNU_IDS ב SemEval-2018 משימה 12: קודד משפטים עם קטורים קונטקסטולוגיים'}
{'en': 'We present a novel neural architecture for the Argument Reasoning Comprehension task of SemEval 2018. It is a simple neural network consisting of three parts, collectively judging whether the logic built on a set of given sentences (a claim, reason, and warrant) is plausible or not. The model utilizes contextualized word vectors pre-trained on large machine translation (MT) datasets as a form of transfer learning, which can help to mitigate the lack of training data. Quantitative analysis shows that simply leveraging LSTMs trained on MT datasets outperforms several baselines and non-transferred models, achieving accuracies of about 70 % on the development set and about 60 % on the test set.', 'ar': 'نقدم معمارية عصبية جديدة لمهمة فهم المنطق المنطقي في SemEval 2018. إنها شبكة عصبية بسيطة تتكون من ثلاثة أجزاء ، تحدد بشكل جماعي ما إذا كان المنطق المبني على مجموعة من الجمل المعطاة (ادعاء وسبب ومذكرة) معقول أم لا. يستخدم النموذج متجهات الكلمات السياقية المدربة مسبقًا على مجموعات بيانات الترجمة الآلية الكبيرة (MT) كشكل من أشكال التعلم بالنقل ، والذي يمكن أن يساعد في التخفيف من نقص بيانات التدريب. يُظهر التحليل الكمي أن الاستفادة ببساطة من LSTMs المدربة على مجموعات بيانات MT يتفوق في الأداء على العديد من الخطوط الأساسية والنماذج غير المنقولة ، مما يحقق دقة تبلغ حوالي 70٪ في مجموعة التطوير وحوالي 60٪ في مجموعة الاختبار.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma nova arquitetura neural para a tarefa Argument Reasoning Comprehension do SemEval 2018. É uma rede neural simples que consiste em três partes, julgando coletivamente se a lógica construída em um conjunto de sentenças dadas (uma afirmação, razão e garantia) é plausível ou não. O modelo utiliza vetores de palavras contextualizados pré-treinados em grandes conjuntos de dados de tradução automática (MT) como uma forma de aprendizado de transferência, o que pode ajudar a mitigar a falta de dados de treinamento. A análise quantitativa mostra que o simples aproveitamento de LSTMs treinados em conjuntos de dados MT supera várias linhas de base e modelos não transferidos, alcançando precisão de cerca de 70% no conjunto de desenvolvimento e cerca de 60% no conjunto de teste.', 'es': 'Presentamos una arquitectura neuronal novedosa para la tarea de Comprensión de Razonamiento Argumentario de SemEval 2018. Es una red neuronal simple que consta de tres partes, que juzgan colectivamente si la lógica basada en un conjunto de oraciones dadas (una afirmación, una razón y una orden judicial) es plausible o no. El modelo utiliza vectores de palabras contextualizados previamente entrenados en grandes conjuntos de datos de traducción automática (MT) como una forma de aprendizaje de transferencia, que puede ayudar a mitigar la falta de datos de entrenamiento. El análisis cuantitativo muestra que el simple aprovechamiento de los LSTM capacitados en conjuntos de datos de MT supera a varios modelos de referencia y no transferidos, logrando precisiones de alrededor del 70% en el conjunto de desarrollo y alrededor del 60% en el conjunto de pruebas.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une nouvelle architecture neuronale pour la tâche de compréhension du raisonnement des arguments de SemEval 2018. Il s'agit d'un réseau neuronal simple composé de trois parties, qui évaluent collectivement si la logique fondée sur un ensemble de phrases données (une réclamation, un motif et un mandat) est plausible ou non. Le modèle utilise des vecteurs de mots contextualisés pré-entraînés sur de grands ensembles de données de traduction automatique (TA) comme forme d'apprentissage par transfert, ce qui peut aider à pallier le manque de données de formation. L'analyse quantitative montre que le simple fait de tirer parti des LSTM formés sur des ensembles de données MT surpasse plusieurs modèles de référence et non transférés, atteignant des précisions d'environ 70\xa0% sur l'ensemble de développement et d'environ 60\xa0% sur l'ensemble de test.", 'ja': '私たちは、SemEval 2018の議論推論理解タスクのための新しいニューラルアーキテクチャを提示します。これは、3つの部分からなる単純なニューラルネットワークであり、与えられた文のセット（主張、理性、および令状）上に構築された論理が妥当かどうかを集合的に判断する。このモデルは、大規模な機械翻訳（ MT ）データセットで事前にトレーニングされたコンテキスト化されたワードベクトルを転送学習の一形態として利用し、トレーニングデータの不足を軽減するのに役立ちます。定量分析は、MTデータセットで訓練されたLSTMを単純に活用すると、いくつかのベースラインおよび非移転モデルを上回り、開発セットで約70 ％、試験セットで約60 ％の精度を達成することを示しています。', 'zh': '为SemEval 2018论理解新神经架构。 其简神经网络也,三而成之,共立於一组给定句(声明,与)辩同理也。 凡大机器翻译(MT)数集上豫教者词向量以为迁徙,所以助缓教数之阙也。 定量分析之分析,唯在机器翻译数集上训练者LSTM胜数基线非移模形,成约70%之精于开发集上,成约60%之精于测试集上。', 'hi': 'हम SemEval 2018 के तर्क तर्क समझ कार्य के लिए एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका वास्तुकला प्रस्तुत करते हैं। यह एक सरल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क है जिसमें तीन भाग होते हैं, सामूहिक रूप से यह देखते हुए कि दिए गए वाक्यों (एक दावा, कारण और वारंट) के सेट पर बनाया गया तर्क प्रशंसनीय है या नहीं। मॉडल हस्तांतरण सीखने के एक रूप के रूप में बड़े मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) डेटासेट पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित संदर्भित शब्द वैक्टर का उपयोग करता है, जो प्रशिक्षण डेटा की कमी को कम करने में मदद कर सकता है। मात्रात्मक विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि एमटी डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित एलएसटीएम का लाभ उठाना कई बेसलाइन और गैर-स्थानांतरित मॉडलों को मात देता है, विकास सेट पर लगभग 70% और परीक्षण सेट पर लगभग 60% की सटीकता प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем новую нейронную архитектуру для задачи «Понимание аргументации» SemEval 2018. Это простая нейронная сеть, состоящая из трех частей, коллективно оценивающая, является ли логика, построенная на наборе заданных предложений (утверждение, причина и ордер) правдоподобной или нет. Модель использует контекстуализированные векторы слов, предварительно обученные на больших наборах данных машинного перевода (MT) в качестве формы обучения передаче, что может помочь смягчить недостаток обучающих данных. Количественный анализ показывает, что простое использование LSTM, обученных на наборах данных MT, превосходит несколько базовых и непередаваемых моделей, достигая точности около 70% на наборе разработок и около 60% на наборе тестов.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid ailtireacht néarúil nua i láthair don tasc Cuimsithe Réasúnaithe Argóint de SemEval 2018. Is líonra néarúil simplí é comhdhéanta de thrí chuid, ag déanamh breithiúnais le chéile an bhfuil an loighic a tógadh ar shraith abairtí tugtha (éileamh, cúis agus barántas) inchreidte. nó nach bhfuil. Úsáideann an tsamhail veicteoirí comhthéacsúla focal a réamhthraenáilte ar thacair shonraí mhóra aistriúcháin mheaisín (MT) mar chineál foghlama aistrithe, rud a chuideoidh leis an easpa sonraí oiliúna a mhaolú. Léiríonn anailís chainníochtúil go n-éiríonn níos fearr le giaráil LSTManna atá oilte ar thacair sonraí MT ná roinnt bonnlínte agus samhlacha neamhaistrithe, ag baint amach beachtas de thart ar 70% ar an tacar forbartha agus thart ar 60% ar an tacar tástála.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტური ნეიროლური აქტიქტურაცია 2018-ის SemEval-ის აპრომენტის მიზეზის კომპრეცენციის საქმე. ეს სამი ნაწილიდან მხოლოდ ნეიროლური ქსელია, რომელიც კოლექტიურად გადაწყვეტილია თუ არა ლოგიკა, რომელიც მიუთითებული სიტყვების ნაწილიდან დააყენებულია (წარმოდგენა, მიზეზა და მოდელის გამოყენება კონტექსტუალური სიტყვების ვიქტორები, რომელიც დიდი მაქტონის გაგრძელებაში (MT) მონაცემების გაგრძელებაში იყენებს, რომელიც შეუძლიათ გაგრძელება კვანტიტიტური ანალიზი ჩვენებს, რომ მხოლოდ LSTMs მონაცემების განმავლობაში გამოყენება MT მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას უფრო მეტი ბაზი ხაზები და არ მონაცემები მოდელები, რომლებიც განვითარებაში 70% უფ', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική για το έργο κατανόησης επιχειρημάτων του SemEval 2018. Είναι ένα απλό νευρωνικό δίκτυο που αποτελείται από τρία μέρη, κρίνοντας συλλογικά αν η λογική που βασίζεται σε ένα σύνολο συγκεκριμένων προτάσεων (αξίωση, λόγος και ένταλμα) είναι εύλογη ή όχι. Το μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί διανύσματα λέξεων που έχουν προ-εκπαιδευτεί σε μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων μηχανικής μετάφρασης (ΜΤ) ως μορφή μάθησης μεταφοράς, η οποία μπορεί να βοηθήσει στον μετριασμό της έλλειψης δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Η ποσοτική ανάλυση δείχνει ότι η απλή αξιοποίηση των LSTMs που εκπαιδεύονται σε σύνολα δεδομένων ΜΤ ξεπερνά αρκετές γραμμές βάσης και μη μεταφερόμενα μοντέλα, επιτυγχάνοντας ακρίβεια περίπου 70% στο σύνολο ανάπτυξης και περίπου 60% στο σύνολο δοκιμής.', 'hu': 'Új neurális architektúrát mutatunk be a SemEval 2018 Argument Reasoning Comprehension feladatához. Ez egy egyszerű neurális hálózat, amely három részből áll, és együttesen megítéli, hogy az adott mondatok sorára épülő logika (követelés, ok és parancs) valószínű-e vagy sem. A modell a nagyméretű gépi fordítási (MT) adatkészleteken előre képzett kontextuális szóvektorokat használ a transzfer tanulás formájaként, ami segíthet enyhíteni a képzési adatok hiányát. A mennyiségi elemzés azt mutatja, hogy az MT adatkészletekre képzett LSTM-ek egyszerű hasznosítása több alapvető és nem átadott modellt felülmúlja, így a fejlesztési készleten körülbelül 70%-os, a tesztkészleten pedig körülbelül 60%-os pontosságot ér el.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome naują 2018 m. SemEval „Argumento pagrįstumo supratimo“ užduoties neurologinę architektūrą. Tai paprastas nervinis tinklas, kurį sudaro trys dalys, bendrai vertinant, ar logika, pagrįsta tam tikrais sakiniais (teiginys, priežastis ir warrantas), yra tikėtina arba ne. Modelyje kaip perdavimo mokymosi form a naudojami kontekstiniai žodžių vektoriai, iš anksto parengti dideliuose mašinų vertimo (MT) duomenų rinkiniuose, kurie gali padėti sumažinti mokymo duomenų trūkumą. Kiekybinė analizė rodo, kad paprasčiausiai naudojant MT duomenų rinkiniuose apmokytus LSTM naudojamas svertas yra didesnis už kelis bazinius ir neperdirbtus modelius, siekiant apie 70 % tikslumo vystymosi rinkiniuose ir apie 60 % bandymų rinkiniuose.', 'it': "Presentiamo una nuova architettura neurale per il compito Argument Reasoning Comprehension di SemEval 2018. Si tratta di una semplice rete neurale composta da tre parti, che giudicano collettivamente se la logica costruita su un insieme di frasi date (una rivendicazione, una ragione e un mandato) è plausibile o meno. Il modello utilizza vettori di parole contestualizzati pre-addestrati su grandi set di dati di traduzione automatica (MT) come forma di apprendimento di trasferimento, che può aiutare a mitigare la mancanza di dati di formazione. L'analisi quantitativa mostra che il semplice utilizzo di LSTM formati su set di dati MT supera diverse linee di base e modelli non trasferiti, raggiungendo precisione di circa il 70% sul set di sviluppo e circa il 60% sul set di test.", 'mk': 'Презентираме нова нервна архитектура за задачата на Семевал 2018. Тоа е едноставна нервна мрежа која се состои од три дела, колективно судејќи дали логиката изградена на одредени реченици (тврдење, причина и налог) е веројатна или не. Моделот ги користи контекстуалните вектори на зборови предобучени на големите машински преведувачки (MT) податоци како форма на трансферентно учење, што може да помогне да го намали недостатокот на податоци за обука. Квантитативната анализа покажува дека едноставно употребувањето на ЛСТМ обучени на МТ податоци надминува неколку основни линии и нетрансферирани модели, достигнувајќи точност од околу 70 отсто на наборот за развој и околу 60 отсто на тестот.', 'kk': 'Біз 2018 жылдың semiEval аргументтің түсініктері үшін романдық невралдық архитектурасын таңдаймыз. Бұл үш бөліктен құрылған қарапайым невралдық желі, біріктірілген сөйлемелердің логикалық (сұрақ, себепті және орнатушылық) келтірілген сөйлемелердің тәуелдігін біріктіруге болады. Бұл үлгі үлкен машинаны аудару (MT) деректер қорларындағы контекстуалды сөздер векторларының алдында аудару оқыту түрі ретінде қолданылады. Бұл оқыту деректерінің жоқ болуын көмектесе алады. Көлемативтік анализ MT деректер қорларында оқылған LSTMs бағдарламасының бірнеше негізгі жолдарды және аударылмаған үлгілерді өзгертуге болады, жасау бағдарламасында 70% деген және тест бағдарламасында 60% деген дәрежесін жетк', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan arkitektur saraf baru untuk tugas Pemahaman Argumen SemEval 2018. Ia adalah rangkaian saraf sederhana yang terdiri dari tiga bahagian, menilai secara kolektif sama ada logik yang dibina pada set kalimat tertentu (tuntutan, alasan, dan waran) adalah boleh atau tidak. Model menggunakan vektor perkataan kontekstualisasi dilatih-dilatih pada set data terjemahan mesin besar (MT) sebagai bentuk pembelajaran pemindahan, yang boleh membantu untuk mengurangi kekurangan data latihan. Analisis kuantitatif menunjukkan bahawa penggunaan LSTM yang dilatih pada set data MT melampaui beberapa garis dasar dan model yang tidak dipindahkan, mencapai ketepatan sekitar 70% pada set pembangunan dan sekitar 60% pada set ujian.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018-ന്റെ ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് പുതുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടേഷന്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഇത് മൂന്നു ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉള്ള ഒരു ലളിതമായ നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200d ആണ്. കൊടുത്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ലോഗിക്ക് പണിതിരിക്കു വലിയ മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തില്\u200d (എംടി) ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വാക്ക് വെക്ടറുകള്\u200d മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പര എംടി ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിശീലനം ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നത് എസ്റ്റിഎസ്റ്റിഎസ്സിനെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് മാത്രമാണെന്ന് ക്വാന്റിറ്റേറ്', 'mn': 'Бид 2018 оны SemEval-ын аргументын шалтгаан шалтгааныг шинэ сэтгэл зүйн архитектурыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ бол гурван хэсгийг бүрдүүлдэг энгийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээн юм. Энэ нь ологикийг хэдэн өгүүлбэрүүд дээр бүтээсэн эсэхийг хамтдаа шалгаж үзэх боломжтой эсэхийг шалгаж байна. Загвар нь том машины хөрөнгө оруулах (MT) өгөгдлийн санг шилжүүлэх сургалтын хэлбэрээр орчин үеийн векторуудыг ашигладаг. Энэ нь сургалтын өгөгдлийг багасгах боломжтой. Мөн хэмжээний шинжилгээ нь MT өгөгдлийн сан дээр сургалтын LSTMs-г зөвхөн хөгжлийн төлөө 70% болон шалгалтын төлөө 60% нь олон суурь шугам, шинжилгээгүй загваруудыг ашиглаж чадна.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw arkitettura newrali ġdida għall-kompitu ta' Komprensjoni ta' Argument Reasoning of Comprehension ta' SemEval 2018. Huwa netwerk newrali sempliċi li jikkonsisti minn tliet partijiet, li jiġbor il-ġudizzju dwar jekk il-loġika mibnija fuq sett ta’ sentenzi partikolari (talba, raġuni, u mandat) hijiex plawżibbli jew le. Il-mudell juża vetturi tal-kliem kuntestwalizzati mħarrġa minn qabel fuq settijiet ta’ dejta kbar ta’ traduzzjoni bil-magna (MT) bħala forma ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment, li jista’ jgħin biex jittaffa n-nuqqas ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ. Analiżi kwantitattiva turi li sempliċement l-ingranaġġ ta’ LSTMs imħarrġa fuq settijiet ta’ dejta MT jaqbeż diversi linji bażi u mudelli mhux trasferiti, u jikseb preċiżjonijiet ta’ madwar 70% fuq is-sett ta’ żvilupp u madwar 60% fuq is-sett ta’ ttestjar.", 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nową architekturę neuronową dla zadania Argument Reasoning Comprehension SemEval 2018. Jest to prosta sieć neuronowa składająca się z trzech części, wspólnie oceniająca, czy logika zbudowana na zbiorze danych zdań (roszczenie, rozum i nakaz) jest wiarygodna czy nie. Model wykorzystuje kontekstualizowane wektory słów wstępnie przeszkolone na dużych zbiorach danych tłumaczenia maszynowego (MT) jako formę uczenia się transferowego, co może pomóc złagodzić brak danych szkoleniowych. Analiza ilościowa pokazuje, że po prostu wykorzystanie LSTMów przeszkolonych na zbiorach danych MT przewyższa kilka linii bazowych i nieprzeniesionych modeli, osiągając dokładność około 70% na zestawie rozwojowym i około 60% na zestawie testowym.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o arhitectură neurală nouă pentru sarcina de înțelegere a argumentului raționamentului SemEval 2018. Este o rețea neuronală simplă compusă din trei părți, judecând colectiv dacă logica construită pe un set de propoziții date (o revendicare, motiv și mandat) este plauzibilă sau nu. Modelul utilizează vectori de cuvinte contextualizați pre-instruiți pe seturi de date mari de traducere automată (MT) ca formă de învățare prin transfer, care poate contribui la atenuarea lipsei de date de formare. Analiza cantitativă arată că simpla utilizare a LSTMs instruiți pe seturi de date MT depășește mai multe linii de bază și modele netransfere, obținând acurateți de aproximativ 70% pe setul de dezvoltare și aproximativ 60% pe setul de testare.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein novel neuralarkitektur for Argument Reasoning Comprehension task of SemEval 2018. Det er ein enkel neuralnettverk som består av tre deler, samledig og bestemmer om logikken bygd på eit sett av oppgitte setningar (eit tiltak, grunn og orden) er tilgjengeleg eller ikkje. Modellen brukar kontekstualiserte ordvektorar som er forelært på store maskineomsetjingar (MT) som form av overføringsling, som kan hjelpa til å redusera manglende opplæringsdata. Kvantitativ analyse viser at enkelt bruk av LSTMs som treng på MT-datasett utfører fleire baselinjer og ikkje-overførte modeller, og når det gjer nøyaktighet på omtrent 70 % på utviklingssettet og omtrent 60 % på testsettet.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novu neuralnu arhitekturu za zadatak Argument a za osvajanje kompresije semiEvala 2018. To je jednostavna nervna mreža koja se sastoji od tri dijela, kolektivno osuđuje da li je logika izgrađena na setu određenih rečenica (tvrdnja, razlog i nalog) uvjerljiva ili ne. Model koristi kontekstualizirani vektori riječi predobučeni na velikim kompletima prevoda (MT) podataka kao oblik učenja prevoda, koji može pomoći da smanji nedostatak podataka o obuci. Kvantitativna analiza pokazuje da jednostavno uključivanje LSTMs obučenih na MT podacima iznosi nekoliko osnovnih linija i modela bez prebacivanja, ostvarivanje tačnosti oko 70% na setu razvoja i oko 60% na setu testova.', 'so': 'Waxaannu sameynaa dhismaha neurada ee warqada ah ee sababta kaalmada ee SemEval 2018. Waa shabakadda neurada ee fudud oo ka mid ah saddex qeybood, si wada jir ah u xukunta in xirfadda lagu dhisay (dacwad, sabab iyo ogolaansho) uu ku habboon karo iyo in kale. Tusaale wuxuu u isticmaalaa vectors oo ku tababaray horay u tababarida tarjumaadka machine (MT) sida foom u ah waxbarashada bedelka, kaas oo caawinaya koobinta baahida waxbarashada. Shahaadada koontarooyinka waxaa muuqda in la siiyo LSTMs oo fudud oo lagu tababaray MT databases wuxuu sameeyaa tusaalooyin badan oo asal ah iyo tusaalo aan la wareejin, waxayna gaadhaa saxda qiyaastii 70% oo ku saabsan koritaanka iyo qiyaastii 60% oo ku qoran tijaabada.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en ny neural arkitektur för SemEval 2018 års Argument Reasoning Comprehension-uppgift. Det är ett enkelt neuralt nätverk bestående av tre delar, som kollektivt bedömer om logiken byggd på en uppsättning givna meningar (ett anspråk, skäl och en garanti) är rimlig eller inte. Modellen använder kontextualiserade ordvektorer som är förberedda på stora datauppsättningar för maskinöversättning (MT) som en form av överföringsinlärning, vilket kan bidra till att minska bristen på träningsdata. Kvantitativ analys visar att en enkel användning av LSTMs utbildade på MT-datauppsättningar överträffar flera baslinjer och icke-överförda modeller och uppnår noggrannheter på cirka 70% på utvecklingsuppsättningen och cirka 60% på testuppsättningen.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරදේශයක් ලැබෙනවා සෙම්වෙල් 2018 ගේ ප්\u200dරදේශයක් සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් නිර්මාණය සිද්ධ ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයෙක්, කොටස් තුනක් තියෙනවා, සම්පූර්ණයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා, දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර සම්පූර්ණයෙන්  මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරවේශය සම්බන්ධ වචන වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ලොකු මැෂින් භාෂාව (MT) දත්ත සෙට් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ඒක ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ MT දත්ත සැටීමේ ප්\u200dරධාන LSTMs ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා කියලා, පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ විශ්ල', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய பாதுகாப்பு உருவாக்கத்தை காண்பிக்கிறோம் செம்வால் 2018ன் புதுப்பித்தல் செயல். இது மூன்று பகுதிகளில் உள்ள ஒரு சுலபமான புதிய பிணையத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல், கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்களின் மீது தொடர்பு உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளதா என இந்த மாதிரி பெரிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (MT) தரவு அமைப்புகளை மாற்று கற்றத்தின் வடிவமாக பயன்படுத்துகிறது, இது பயிற்சி தரவின் குறைவை  குவாண்டியாடிவ் ஆராய்ச்சி காட்டுகிறது எம்டி தரவுத்தளங்களில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட LSTMs அனுப்புவது பல அடிப்படைகள் மற்றும் மாற்றப்படாத மாதிரிகளை செயல்படுத', 'ur': 'ہم نے آرمونٹ ریسونینگ کامپرینسی کام کے لئے ایک نور نورول معماری پیش کیا ہے۔ یہ ایک ساده نئورل نیٹ ورک ہے جو تین قسموں میں سے ہے، جمع طور پر فیصلہ کرتا ہے کہ کیا ایک مجموعہ کے مطابق لکھے ہوئے مطابق لکھے ہوئے مطابق ہے یا نہ Model uses contextualized word vectors pre-trained on large machine translation (MT) datasets as a form of transfer learning, which can help to mitigate the lack of training data. Quantitative analysis shows that simply leveraging LSTMs trained on MT datasets exceeds several baselines and non-transferred models, achieving accuracy of about 70% on the development set and about 60% on the test set.', 'uz': "Biz SemEval 2018'ning Argumentni qayta qilish vazifasini yetarmoqchimiz. Name Name Quantitativ analyzeri ko'rsatadi, MT maʼlumotlarida o'rganilgan LSTMs yordamida ko'plab baʼzi asosiy modellarni ishga tushirish mumkin, taʼminlovchi tuzuvda 70% va sinov sohasida 60% yordamida ishlatish mumkin.", 'vi': "Chúng tôi giới thiệu một kiến trúc thần kinh mới cho công việc quy toàn lý lẽ của Semkhai 38. Nó là một mạng lưới thần kinh đơn giản, gồm ba bộ phận, phán xét chung rằng logic được xây dựng trên một bộ câu đã đưa ra (một yêu cầu, lý do và trát) có hợp lý hay không. Mô hình sử dụng các cỗ máy có tính từ được hình thức trên các tập tin cơ bản lớn (MTV) như một hình thức học chuyển nhượng, giúp giảm thiểu sự thiếu dữ liệu huấn luyện. Phân tích trữ lượng cho thấy đơn giản là vận dụng các tập tin giao dịch trên các tập tin giao truyền đạt được nhiều đường cơ bản và mẫu không được truyền đi, đạt đạt được độ chính xác khoảng khoảng khoảng 770='về bộ phát triển và khoảng một mươi lăm trong bộ thử nghiệm.", 'bg': 'Представяме нова невронна архитектура за задачата Разбиране на аргументите на СемЕвал 2018. Това е проста невронна мрежа, състояща се от три части, колективно преценявайки дали логиката, изградена върху набор от дадени изречения (претенция, причина и заповед) е правдоподобна или не. Моделът използва контекстуализирани текстови вектори, предварително обучени върху големи масиви от данни за машинен превод (МТ), като форма на трансферно обучение, което може да помогне за смекчаване на липсата на данни за обучение. Количественият анализ показва, че просто усвояването на ЛТМ обучени върху МТ набори от данни превъзхожда няколко базови линии и непрехвърлени модели, като постига точност от около 70% върху разработката и около 60% върху тестовия комплект.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een nieuwe neurale architectuur voor de Argument Reasoning Comprehension taak van SemEval 2018. Het is een eenvoudig neuraal netwerk bestaande uit drie delen, gezamenlijk beoordelen of de logica gebouwd op een reeks gegeven zinnen (een claim, reden en bevel) plausibel is of niet. Het model maakt gebruik van contextualiseerde woordvectoren die vooraf zijn getraind op grote datasets van machinevertaling (MT) als een vorm van overdracht leren, wat kan helpen om het gebrek aan trainingsgegevens te verminderen. Kwantitatieve analyse toont aan dat het gebruik van LSTMs die zijn getraind op MT-datasets, meerdere basislijnen en niet-overgedragen modellen overtreft, waardoor nauwkeurigheiden van ongeveer 70% op de ontwikkelingsset en ongeveer 60% op de testset worden bereikt.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine neuartige neuronale Architektur für die Argument Reasoning Comprehension Aufgabe von SemEval 2018. Es ist ein einfaches neuronales Netzwerk, das aus drei Teilen besteht und gemeinsam beurteilt, ob die Logik, die auf einer Reihe von gegebenen Sätzen aufgebaut ist (ein Anspruch, eine Vernunft und ein Warrant), plausibel ist oder nicht. Das Modell verwendet kontextualisierte Wortvektoren, die auf großen maschinellen Übersetzungsdatensätzen (MT) vortrainiert wurden, als eine Form des Transferlernens, was helfen kann, den Mangel an Trainingsdaten zu verringern. Quantitative Analysen zeigen, dass die einfache Nutzung von LSTMs, die auf MT-Datensätzen trainiert wurden, mehrere Basislinien und nicht übertragene Modelle übertrifft und Genauigkeit von etwa 70% auf dem Entwicklungssatz und ca. 60% auf dem Testsatz erreicht.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan arsitektur saraf novel untuk tugas Pemahaman Argumen SemEval 2018. Ini adalah jaringan saraf sederhana yang terdiri dari tiga bagian, secara kolektif menilai apakah logika dibangun pada set kalimat tertentu (klaim, alasan, dan surat perintah) adalah plausible atau tidak. Model menggunakan vektor kata kontekstualisasi yang dilatih-dilatih pada set data terjemahan mesin besar (MT) sebagai bentuk pembelajaran transfer, yang dapat membantu untuk mengurangi kekurangan data pelatihan. Analisis kuantitatif menunjukkan bahwa hanya menggunakan LSTM yang dilatih pada set data MT melampaui beberapa garis dasar dan model yang tidak dipindahkan, mencapai akurasi sekitar 70% pada set pengembangan dan sekitar 60% pada set tes.', 'ko': '우리는 SemEval 2018의 논점 추리 이해 임무를 위해 새로운 신경 구조를 제시했다.이것은 세 부분으로 구성된 간단한 신경 네트워크로 한 조의 주어진 문장(클레임, 이유와 보증)에 세워진 논리가 합리적인지 공동으로 판단한다.이 모델은 대형 기계번역(MT) 데이터 집합에서 미리 훈련된 어경화 어향량을 이동 학습의 한 형식으로 활용하여 훈련 데이터의 부족을 완화시키는 데 도움이 된다.정량분석에 따르면 MT 데이터 집합에서 훈련된 LSTM을 간단하게 이용하여 몇 가지 기선과 비전이 모델보다 우수하고 개발 집합과 테스트 집합에서 약 70%와 약 60%의 정밀도를 실현했다.', 'fa': 'ما یک معماری عصبی روزنامه برای عملیات تعقیب دلایل آرژومتی SemEval ۲۰۱۸ را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. این شبکه عصبی ساده\u200cای است که از سه قسمت است، با جمعیت تصمیم می\u200cگیرد آیا منطقی بر مجموعه\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جم مدل به عنوان شکل یادگیری انتقال استفاده می\u200cکند که می\u200cتواند کمک کند تا کمبود داده\u200cهای آموزش را کمک کند. تحلیل Quantitative نشان می\u200cدهد که به سادگی تدریج LSTMs در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای MT آموزش داده شده، چند خط پایین و مدل\u200cهای غیر انتقال داده\u200cاند، به دست آوردن دقیقات حدود ۷۰ درصد در مجموعه توسعه و حدود ۶۰ درصد در مجموعه تدریج', 'da': "Vi præsenterer en ny neural arkitektur til Argument Reasoning Comprehension opgaven i SemEval 2018. Det er et simpelt neuralt netværk bestående af tre dele, der kollektivt bedømmer, om logikken bygget på et sæt bestemte sætninger (en påstand, grund og kendelse) er plausibel eller ej. Modellen bruger kontekstualiserede ordvektorer, der er prætrænet på store maskinoversættelsesdata (MT) som en form for overførselslæring, hvilket kan bidrage til at afbøde manglen på træningsdata. Kvantitativ analyse viser, at den simple udnyttelse af LSTM'er, der er uddannet på MT-datasæt, overstiger flere basislinjer og ikke-overførte modeller, hvilket opnår en nøjagtighed på ca. 70% på udviklingssættet og ca. 60% på testsættet.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo novu neuralnu arhitekturu za zadatak za osvajanje argumenta za semiEval 2018. To je jednostavna nervna mreža koja se sastoji od tri dijela, zajedno osuđuje da li je logika izgrađena na setu određenih rečenica (tvrdnja, razlog i nalog) uvjerljiva ili ne. Model koristi kontekstualizirani vektori riječi predobučeni na velikim uređajima prevoda (MT) podataka kao oblik učenja prijenosa, što može pomoći smanjiti nedostatak podataka obuke. Quantitativna analiza pokazuje da jednostavno primjenjivanje LSTMs obučenih na MT podacima iznosi nekoliko osnovnih linija i modela bez prebacivanja, ostvarenje točnosti oko 70% na setu razvoja i oko 60% na setu testova.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n roman neurale arkitektuur voor die Argument waarskyning van komprehensie taak van SemEval 2018. Dit is 'n eenvoudige neuralnetwerk wat bestaan van drie dele, saamstig oordeel of die logiek op 'n stel van gegewe setings gebou is ( 'n aanvraag, rede en waarskuwing) veroorsaaklik is of nie. Die model gebruik contextualiseerde woord vektore voor-opgelei op groot masjien vertaling (MT) datastelle as 'n vorm van oordrag leer, wat kan help om die ontbreek van onderwerp data te verminder. Quantitatiewe analisie wys dat eenvoudig die verwysing van LSTMs op MT datastelle onderwerp het, uitvoer verskeie basisline en nie-oordragte modele, aanvaardigheid van omtrent 70% op die ontwikkelingsstel en omtrent 60% op die toets stel.", 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza ujenzi wa kisasa wa kisasa kwa ajili ya Kusoma Udhibiti wa Msimu wa SemEval 2018. Ni mtandao rahisi wa neura unaohusika na sehemu tatu, kwa pamoja na kuhukumu kama mantiki ilijengwa kwenye seti ya seti zilizopewa hukumu (madai, sababu na ruhusa) ni jambo lisilo sahihi au la. Mfano huo unatumia vectors of word-strickened pre-trained on data large machine (MT) as a form of transfer learning, which can help to punguze ukosefu wa taarifa za mafunzo. Uchambuzi wa upinzani unaonyesha kwamba kutumia mafunzo ya LSTMs katika seti za taarifa za MT pekee hufanya mifano kadhaa ya msingi na zisizo hamasa, na kupata uhakika wa takriban asilimia 70 kwenye seti ya maendeleo na takriban asilimia 60 kwenye seti ya jaribio.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԵվալ" բանավեճի ընկալումների նոր նյարդային ճարտարապետություն: Սա պարզ նյարդային ցանց է, որը կազմված է երեք մասից, հավաքական դատողությամբ, արդյոք տրված նախադասությունների վրա հիմնված տրամաբանությունը հավատալի է, թե ոչ: Մոդելը օգտագործում է կոնտեքստիալ բառերի վեկտորներ, որոնք նախապատրաստված են մեծ մեքենային թարգմանման (MT) տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որպես փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության ձև, ինչը կարող է օգնել նվազեցնել ուսուցման տվյալների Քանտավորական վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ MT տվյալների համակարգերի վրա սովորեցված LSMT-ների օգտագործումը պարզապես արտահայտում է մի քանի հիմնական գծեր և ոչ փոխանցված մոդելներ, որոնք հասնում են զարգացման համակարգի ճշգրտության մոտ 70 տոկոսին և մոտ 60 տոկոսին', 'az': "Biz 2018-ci SemEval'in Argument Reasoning Comprehension Taski üçün yeni bir nöral arhitektür göstəririk. Bu, üç parçadan oluşan basit bir nöral şəklədir. Bircə müəyyən edilmiş cümlələrdə logik inşa edilmiş müəyyən edilmişdir. Model böyük maşın çevirilməsi (MT) veri qurğuları öyrənmək üçün müxtəlif söz vektörlərini istifadə edər ki, təhsil məlumatlarının əskilməsinə kömək edə bilər. Kvantitatlı analizi göstərir ki, MT veri qutularında təhsil edilən LSTMs-ləri təhsil etmək, təhsil qutularında 70%-dən və testdə 60%-dən çox təhsil çəkilməyən modellərdən üstün gəlir.", 'tr': 'Biz 2018-nji ýylda SemEval tarapyndan çykyş arhitekturlygy üçin bir roman görkeýäris Bu üç bölümden oluşan basit bir neural a ýdyr, netijesi berilen sözleriň bir toparynda düşünýän ýa-da düşünüp bilmeýändigini çözýär. Bu model uly maşynyň terjime edilmesinde öňünden öňünden öňünden gelen söz vektörlerini transfers öwrenmesi üçin ullanýar. Bu hat maglumatyň ýok bolmagyny azaltmak üçin kömek edip biler. Mazmunlik analyzasy MT veri düzümlerinde bilinmeli LSTMsleri birnäçe basit hatlary we taýýarlanmadan nusgalary üstün edýändigini görkez, gelişme düzümlerinde 70% dyr we testi düzümlerinde 60% dyr.', 'bn': 'আমরা সেমইভাল ২০১৮ এর আর্গামেন্ট পুনরুদ্ধার কাজের জন্য একটি নিউরুল কাঠামো উপস্থাপন করছি। এটা একটি সাধারণ নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক যার মধ্যে তিনটি অংশ রয়েছে, সেখানে একত্রে বিচার করা হচ্ছে যে কোন ধরনের শাস্তির উপর যোগাযোগ তৈরি হয়েছে (দাবী, কা The model utilizes contextualized word vectors pre-trained on large machine translation (MT) datasets as a form of transfer learning, which can help to mitigate the lack of training data.  কোয়ান্টিটেটিভ বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে এমটি ডাটাসেটে প্রশিক্ষিত এলস্টিএমএস প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা শুধুমাত্র বেশ কয়েকটি বেসেলাইন এবং পরিবর্তন না করা মডেল প্রদর', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një arkitekturë neurale të re për detyrën e kuptimit të Argumenteve të SemEval 2018. It is a simple neural network consisting of three parts, collectively judging whether the logic built on a set of given sentences (a claim, reason, and warrant) is plausible or not.  Modeli përdor vektorët e fjalëve kontekstualizuar të paratrajnuar në settet e dhënash të mëdha të përkthimit të makinave (MT) si një form ë mësimi transferues, që mund të ndihmojë për të lehtësuar mungesën e të dhënave të trajnimit. Quantitative analysis shows that simply leveraging LSTMs trained on MT datasets outperforms several baselines and non-transferred models, achieving accuracies of about 70% on the development set and about 60% on the test set.', 'am': 'የዘምEval 2018 የአርጉም አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ስራዎችን እናቀርባለን፡፡ በሦስት ክፍሎች ውስጥ የሚቆጠሩ የናቡር መረብ ነው፡፡ ሞዴል የተጠቃሚ ቃላት vectors (MT) በታላቅ machine ትርጓሜ (MT) ዳታተርሚዎችን እንደ ምርጫዎች ትምህርት መጠቀም ይጠቅማል፤ ይህም የግንኙነትን ዳታ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ ይችላል፡፡ ጥያቄ አስተያየት MT ዳታተር የተጠለፈውን LSTMs በመስጠት ብዙዎችን መሳሪያዎች እና ያልተለወጠውን ሞዴላዎችን ለማግኘት የሚያሳየው የ70 በመቶ ማህበራዊ ግንኙነት እና በሞክራዊ ክፍተት ላይ 60 በመቶ የሚያህል ነው፡፡', 'ca': "Presentam una nova arquitectura neuronal per a la tasca de comprensió de l'Argument Reasoning of SemEval 2018. És una xarxa neural senzilla composta de tres parts, jugant col·lectivament si la lògica basada en un conjunt de frases dadas (una reclamació, raó i mandat) és plausible o no. El model utilitza vectors de paraules contextualitzats pré-entrenats en grans conjunts de dades de traducció màquina (MT) com una form a d'aprenentatge de transfer ència, que pot ajudar a mitigar la falta de dades d'entrenament. L'anàlisi quantitativ mostra que simplement aprofitar LSTMs entrenats en conjunts de dades MT supera diverses línies de base i models no transferits, aconseguint exactitudes d'aproximadament 70% en el conjunt de desenvolupament i aproximadament 60% en el conjunt de provas.", 'et': 'Tutvustame uudset neuroarhitektuuri SemEval 2018 argumentide mõistmise ülesandeks. See on lihtne närvivõrk, mis koosneb kolmest osast, mis ühiselt otsustavad, kas antud lausete kogumile ehitatud loogika (nõue, põhjus ja garantii) on usutav või mitte. Mudel kasutab kontekstipõhiseid sõnavaktoreid, mis on eelnevalt koolitatud suurte masintõlke andmekogumitega (MT) kui siirdeõppe vormi, mis aitab leevendada koolitusandmete puudumist. Kvantitatiivne analüüs näitab, et lihtsalt MT andmekogumitel koolitatud LSTMde kasutamine ületab mitmeid baasliine ja ülekandeta mudeleid, saavutades arenduskomplekti täpsuse umbes 70% ja testikomplekti umbes 60%.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden neuroarkkitehtuurin SemEval 2018:n Argument Reasoning Comprehension -tehtävään. Se on yksinkertainen hermoverkko, joka koostuu kolmesta osasta, jotka yhdessä arvioivat, onko määrättyjen lauseiden (väite, syy ja määräys) logiikka uskottava vai ei. Mallissa hyödynnetään kontekstualisoituja sanavektoreita, jotka on koulutettu suuriin konekäännöstietoihin (MT), siirtooppimisena, joka voi auttaa vähentämään koulutustiedon puutetta. Kvantitatiivinen analyysi osoittaa, että pelkkä MT-tietoaineistoilla koulutettujen LSTMien hyödyntäminen ylittää useita peruslinjoja ja siirtämättömiä malleja saavuttaen noin 70% tarkkuuden kehityssarjassa ja noin 60% testisarjassa.', 'cs': 'Představujeme novou neuronovou architekturu pro úlohu Argument Reasoning Comprehension SemEval 2018. Jedná se o jednoduchou neuronovou síť sestávající ze tří částí, společně posuzující, zda je logika postavená na souboru daných vět (tvrzení, rozum a zaručení) věrohodná nebo ne. Model využívá kontextualizované slovní vektory předem trénované na velkých datových sadách strojového překladu (MT) jako formu transferového učení, což může pomoci zmírnit nedostatek tréninkových dat. Kvantitativní analýza ukazuje, že jednoduché využití LSTMs vycvičených na MT datových sadách předčí několik základních linek a nepřenášených modelů, což dosahuje přesnosti asi 70% na vývojové sadě a asi 60% na testovací sadě.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novu neuralnu arhitekturu za zadatak osvajanja argumenta semiEvala 2018. To je jednostavna nervna mreža koja se sastoji od tri dijela, zajedno osuđuje da li je logika izgrađena na setu određenih rečenica (tvrdnja, razlog i nalog) uvjerljiva ili ne. Model koristi kontekstualizirani vektori riječi predobučeni na velikim kompletima prevoda (MT) podataka kao oblik učenja prevoda, koji može pomoći smanjiti nedostatak podataka obuke. Kvantitativna analiza pokazuje da jednostavno primjenjivanje LSTMs obučenih na MT-ovim podacima iznosi nekoliko osnovnih linija i modela bez prebacivanja, ostvarenje tačnosti oko 70% na setu razvoja i oko 60% na setu testova.', 'jv': 'We present a new architecture Neral for the argument RESUNMATING Comprerension task of seminval 2008. Ana alam sing mbukak bener Peringatan Candidate ate', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo novo nevronsko arhitekturo za nalogo razumevanja argumentov SemEval 2018. Gre za preprosto nevronsko omrežje, sestavljeno iz treh delov, ki skupaj presoja, ali je logika, zgrajena na nizu danih stavkov (trditev, razlog in nalog), verjetna ali ne. Model uporablja kontekstualizirane besedne vektorje, vnaprej usposobljene za velike nabore podatkov strojnega prevajanja (MT), kot obliko učenja prenosa, ki lahko pomaga ublažiti pomanjkanje podatkov o usposabljanju. Kvantitativna analiza kaže, da preprosto izkoriščanje LSTMs, usposobljenih na naborih podatkov MT, presega več osnovnih linij in neprenesenih modelov ter doseže natančnost približno 70% na naboru razvoja in približno 60% na testnem naboru.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani matsayin neural na'ura wa the Argument Resuming Comprehension of Semeval 2018. Shirin neural mai sauƙi ne wanda ke ƙunsa da rabo uku, yana yin hukunci a tsakanin da aka gina login a kan wani salo da aka ba (wani daidai, kwance, da warar). @ info: whatsthis Ana yi motsi na ƙayyade, yana nuna cewa kawai mai bãyar da LStM wanda aka yi wa shirin da shi na MT database na samar da wasu misãlai masu basu'a da ba-transferred, kuma yana sãmu gaskiyar cikakken taki 70% a kan daidaita na motsi da taki 60% kan jarraba.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་ཀྱི་སྒྲུབ་རྗེས་མཁན་དབུགས་གཙང་འབེབས་པའི་ལས་ཀ་ལྟ་བུའི་དཔེ་གཏོང་ཞིག་བཤད་པ་ཡིན། འདི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གསུམ་ཡོད་པའི་རང་ཉིད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་གིས་དམ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་ཚན་གཅིག་ལས་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན། The model utilizes contextualized word vectors pre-trained on large machine translation (MT) datasets as a form of transfer learning, which can help to mitigate the lack of training data. Quantitative analysis shows that simply leveraging LSTMs trained on MT datasets outperforms several baselines and non-transferred models, achieving accuracies of about 70% on the development set and about 60% on the test set.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים ארכיטקטורה עצבית חדשה למשימת ההבנה המסבירה של SemEval 2018. זו רשת עצבית פשוטה שמכילה משלושה חלקים, שופטת באופן קולטיבי אם ההיגיון שנבנה על קבוצת משפטים מסוימים (טענה, סיבה, צו) הוא אמין או לא. The model utilizes contextualized word vectors pre-trained on large machine translation (MT) datasets as a form of transfer learning, which can help to mitigate the lack of training data.  Quantitative analysis shows that simply leveraging LSTMs trained on MT datasets outperforms several baselines and non-transferred models, achieving accuracies of about 70% on the development set and about 60% on the test set.'}
{'en': 'ITNLP-ARC at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'es': 'ITNLP-ARC en la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2018: Argumentos Razonando Comprensión con Atención', 'ar': 'ITNLP-ARC في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: استدلال الحجج والفهم باهتمام', 'fr': 'ITNLP-ARC à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 12\xa0: Compréhension du raisonnement des arguments avec attention', 'pt': 'ITNLP-ARC no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: Argumento Raciocínio Compreensão com Atenção', 'ja': 'ITNLP - ARC at SemEval -2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Understanding with Attention', 'zh': 'ITNLP-ARC在SemEval-2018务12:参数推理注意', 'hi': 'ITNLP-ARC पर SemEval-2018 कार्य 12: ध्यान के साथ तर्क तर्क समझ', 'ru': 'ITNLP-ARC на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Понимание аргументации с вниманием', 'ga': 'ITNLP-ARC ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: Argóint Réasúnaíocht Tuiscint agus Aird', 'ka': 'ITNLP', 'hu': 'ITNLP-ARC a SemEval-2018 12. feladaton: Az érvek érvelése figyelemmel', 'el': 'Εργασία 12: Κατανόηση επιχειρημάτων με προσοχή', 'it': "ITNLP-ARC al SemEval-2018 Task 12: Ragionare l'argomento con attenzione", 'kk': 'ITNLP-ARC at semiEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'lt': 'ITNLP-ARC posėdyje „SemEval-2018“', 'mk': 'ITNLP-ARC на SemEval-2018 задача 12: Разумнување на аргументите со внимание', 'ms': 'ITNLP-ARC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Memahami Argumen Dengan Perhatian', 'mt': 'ITNLP-ARC f’SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്കില്\u200d ITNLP- ARC: അര്\u200dഗ്ഗമെന്റ് വായിക്കുന്നത് ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടാണ്', 'no': 'ITNLP-ARC at semiEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'pl': 'ITNLP-ARC na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Argument uzasadnianie zrozumienia z uwagą', 'ro': 'ITNLP-ARC la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 12: Argumentul raționamentul înțelegerii cu atenție', 'sr': 'ITNLP-ARC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'si': 'ITNLP-ARC at semeval-2018 Job 12: argment Reasoning Comprebension with Attension', 'ta': 'செம்வால்- 2018 பணியில் ITNLP- ARC 12: குறிப்பு வாங்குதல் கவனத்துடன் முழுமையாக்கம்', 'mn': 'ITNLP-ARC at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'so': 'ITNLP-ARC at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reading Comprehension with Attention', 'sv': 'ITNLP-ARC på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: Argument resonerande förståelse med uppmärksamhet', 'ur': 'ITNLP-ARC at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 vazifa 12: Argument Reading with Attention', 'vi': 'ITNLP-Ar-Ar tại SemEvl-208 Task 12: Argument reasonang Compention with Chú ý', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Разбиране на аргументите с внимание', 'da': 'ITNLP-ARC på SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Argument Rating Forståelse med opmærksomhed', 'hr': 'ITNLP-ARC na pola ispitivanja 2018. zadatak 12:', 'nl': 'ITNLP-ARC bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Argument Redenen Begrijpen met Aandacht', 'de': 'ITNLP-ARC bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 12: Argument Reasoning Verständnis mit Aufmerksamkeit', 'id': 'ITNLP-ARC di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Argumen Memahami Pemahaman Dengan Perhatian', 'ko': 'ITNLP-ARC가SemEval-18 임무12: 집중적인 논증 추리 이해', 'sw': 'ITNLP-ARC katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Msingi wa Kusoma Msingi wa Matukio kwa Tazama', 'fa': 'ITNLP-ARC at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'am': 'ITNLP-ARC at SemEval-2018 ስራ 12: Argument Reading Comprehension with Attention', 'sq': 'ITNLP-ARC në SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'hy': 'ITNSP-ARC-ը 2018-ի կիսագնդի 12. հանձնարարությունը. ուշադրություն դարձնելու բանավեճը', 'tr': 'ITNLP-ARC at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'az': 'ITNLP-ARC at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'bs': 'ITNLP-ARC na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'ca': 'ITNLP-ARC a SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১২-এ আইএনএলপি-আর্সি: মনোযোগ দিয়ে আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরায় সম্পূর্ণ করা হচ্ছে', 'af': 'ITNLP-ARC by SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention', 'cs': 'ITNLP-ARC na SemEval-2018 Úkol 12: Porozumění argumentů s pozorností', 'et': 'ITNLP-ARC SemEval-2018 ülesanne 12: argumentide mõistmine tähelepanuga', 'fi': 'ITNLP-ARC SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: Argumentin järkeilyn ymmärtäminen huomiolla', 'he': 'ITNLP-ARC ב SemEval-2018 משימה 12: הסיבה לטעון הבנה עם תשומת לב', 'sk': 'ITNLP-ARC na SemEval-2018 Naloga 12: Razumevanje argumentov s pozornostjo', 'jv': 'UTNLP', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ITNLP-ARC at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Attention'}
{'en': 'Reasoning is a very important topic and has many important applications in the field of natural language processing. Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 The Argument Reasoning Comprehension committed to research natural language reasoning. In this task, we proposed a novel argument reasoning comprehension system, ITNLP-ARC, which use Neural Networks technology to solve this problem. In our system, the LSTM model is involved to encode both the premise sentences and the warrant sentences. The attention model is used to merge the two premise sentence vectors. Through comparing the similarity between the attention vector and each of the two warrant vectors, we choose the one with higher similarity as our system’s final answer.', 'ar': 'التفكير هو موضوع مهم للغاية وله العديد من التطبيقات المهمة في مجال معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. التقييم الدلالي (SemEval) 2018 المهمة 12 "فهم منطق الحجة" ملتزمة ببحث التفكير اللغوي الطبيعي. في هذه المهمة ، اقترحنا نظامًا جديدًا لفهم التفكير المنطقي ، ITNLP-ARC ، والذي يستخدم تقنية الشبكات العصبية لحل هذه المشكلة. في نظامنا ، يتم تضمين نموذج LSTM لترميز كل من الجمل الافتتاحية وجمل الأمر. يستخدم نموذج الانتباه لدمج متجهي الجملة الافتراضيين. من خلال مقارنة التشابه بين متجه الانتباه وكل من متجهي الضمان ، نختار المتجه الأكثر تشابهًا كإجابة نهائية لنظامنا.', 'es': 'El razonamiento es un tema muy importante y tiene muchas aplicaciones importantes en el campo del procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Evaluación Semántica (SemEval) 2018 Tarea 12 «La comprensión del razonamiento del argumento» se comprometió a investigar el razonamiento del lenguaje natural. En esta tarea, propusimos un novedoso sistema de comprensión de razonamiento argumentativo, ITNLP-ARC, que utiliza la tecnología de redes neuronales para resolver este problema. En nuestro sistema, el modelo LSTM se utiliza para codificar tanto las sentencias premisas como las sentencias de orden judicial. El modelo de atención se utiliza para combinar los dos vectores de oraciones premisas. Al comparar la similitud entre el vector de atención y cada uno de los dos vectores de orden, elegimos el que tiene mayor similitud como respuesta final de nuestro sistema.', 'fr': "Le raisonnement est un sujet très important qui trouve de nombreuses applications importantes dans le domaine du traitement du langage naturel. Évaluation sémantique (SemEval) 2018 Tâche 12 «\xa0The Argument Reasoning Comprehension\xa0» engagée dans la recherche sur le raisonnement en langage naturel. Dans cette tâche, nous avons proposé un nouveau système de compréhension du raisonnement des arguments, ITNLP-ARC, qui utilise la technologie des réseaux de neurones pour résoudre ce problème. Dans notre système, le modèle LSTM est impliqué pour coder à la fois les phrases de prémisse et les sentences de mandat. Le modèle d'attention est utilisé pour fusionner les deux vecteurs de phrase prémisse. En comparant la similitude entre le vecteur d'attention et chacun des deux vecteurs de garantie, nous choisissons celui qui présente la plus grande similitude comme réponse finale de notre système.", 'pt': 'O raciocínio é um tópico muito importante e tem muitas aplicações importantes no campo do processamento de linguagem natural. Avaliação Semântica (SemEval) 2018 Tarefa 12 “A Compreensão do Raciocínio Argumentativo” comprometida em pesquisar o raciocínio em linguagem natural. Nesta tarefa, propusemos um novo sistema de compreensão de raciocínio argumentativo, ITNLP-ARC, que utiliza a tecnologia de Redes Neurais para resolver este problema. Em nosso sistema, o modelo LSTM está envolvido para codificar tanto as sentenças de premissa quanto as sentenças de garantia. O modelo de atenção é usado para mesclar os dois vetores de sentença premissa. Ao comparar a similaridade entre o vetor de atenção e cada um dos dois vetores de garantia, escolhemos aquele com maior similaridade como resposta final do nosso sistema.', 'ja': '推論は非常に重要なトピックであり、自然言語処理の分野で多くの重要な応用があります。セマンティック評価（ SemEval ） 2018タスク12「議論の推論理解」は、自然言語の推論を研究することにコミットしています。この課題では、この問題を解決するためにニューラルネットワークスの技術を使用した新しい議論推論理解システム、ITNLP - ARCを提案しました。私たちのシステムでは、前提文と令状文の両方をエンコードするためにLSTMモデルが関与しています。注意モデルは、2つの前提文ベクトルをマージするために使用されます。注意ベクトルと2つのワラントベクトルのそれぞれの類似性を比較することにより、システムの最終答えとしてより高い類似性を持つものを選択します。', 'zh': '推理者,至重之课题,在自然语言处域多要用。 语义评估(SemEval)2018务12"论证理解",务究自然语言理。 此论理解系统ITNLP-ARC,当用神经网络术以决之。 于我系统,及LSTM模编码句于前提句权证句。 注意模形以并两前提句向量。 以意力向量与两保向量之相似性,择其高相似性者向量以为系统之终。', 'hi': 'तर्क एक बहुत ही महत्वपूर्ण विषय है और प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के क्षेत्र में कई महत्वपूर्ण अनुप्रयोग हैं। Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 "The Argument Reasoning Comprehension" प्राकृतिक भाषा तर्क पर शोध करने के लिए प्रतिबद्ध है। इस कार्य में, हमने एक उपन्यास तर्क तर्क समझ प्रणाली, ITNLP-ARC का प्रस्ताव रखा, जो इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क तकनीक का उपयोग करता है। हमारे सिस्टम में, LSTM मॉडल दोनों आधार वाक्यों और वारंट वाक्यों को एन्कोड करने के लिए शामिल है। ध्यान मॉडल का उपयोग दो आधार वाक्य वैक्टर को विलय करने के लिए किया जाता है। ध्यान वेक्टर और दो वारंट वैक्टरों में से प्रत्येक के बीच समानता की तुलना करने के माध्यम से, हम अपने सिस्टम के अंतिम उत्तर के रूप में उच्च समानता के साथ एक को चुनते हैं।', 'ru': 'Обоснование является очень важной темой и имеет много важных приложений в области обработки естественного языка. Семантическая оценка (SemEval) 2018 Задача 12 «Понимание аргументации» посвящена исследованию естественного языкового мышления. В этой задаче мы предложили новую систему осмысления аргументов ITNLP-ARC, которая использует технологию нейронных сетей для решения этой задачи. В нашей системе модель LSTM используется для кодирования как предложений предпосылки, так и предложений ордера. Модель внимания используется для слияния двух векторов предложений предпосылки. Сравнивая сходство между вектором внимания и каждым из двух векторов ордера, мы выбираем тот, который имеет большее сходство, в качестве окончательного ответа нашей системы.', 'ga': 'Is ábhar an-tábhachtach í an réasúnaíocht agus tá go leor feidhmeanna tábhachtacha aige i réimse na próiseála teanga nádúrtha. Tasc 12 Meastóireacht Shéimeantach (SemEval) 2018 “An Argóint Réasúnaithe Tuiscint” do thaighde a dhéanamh ar réasúnaíocht teanga nádúrtha. Sa tasc seo, mholamar córas nua tuisceana réasúnaíochta argóinte, ITNLP-ARC, a úsáideann teicneolaíocht Neural Networks chun an fhadhb seo a réiteach. Inár gcóras, tá an tsamhail LSTM i gceist chun na habairtí tosaigh agus na habairtí barántais araon a ionchódú. Úsáidtear an tsamhail aird chun an dá veicteoir abairte premise a chumasc. Trí chomparáid a dhéanamh ar an gcosúlacht idir an veicteoir aird agus gach ceann den dá veicteoir barántas, roghnaímid an ceann a bhfuil cosúlacht níos airde aige mar fhreagra deiridh ár gcóras.', 'el': 'Η λογική είναι ένα πολύ σημαντικό θέμα και έχει πολλές σημαντικές εφαρμογές στον τομέα της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Αντικείμενο 12 "Η κατανόηση του επιχειρήματος" που έχει δεσμευτεί στην έρευνα της λογικής φυσικής γλώσσας. Σε αυτό το έργο, προτείναμε ένα νέο σύστημα κατανόησης επιχειρηματολογικής, το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί την τεχνολογία Νευρικών Δικτύων για να λύσει αυτό το πρόβλημα. Στο σύστημά μας, το μοντέλο εμπλέκεται για την κωδικοποίηση τόσο των προτάσεων όσο και των ποινών ένταλμα. Το μοντέλο προσοχής χρησιμοποιείται για τη συγχώνευση των δύο διανυσματικών προτάσεων. Συγκρίνοντας την ομοιότητα μεταξύ του διανύσματος προσοχής και καθενός από τα δύο διανύσματα εντάλματος, επιλέγουμε αυτό με μεγαλύτερη ομοιότητα ως τελική απάντηση του συστήματός μας.', 'hu': 'Az érvelés nagyon fontos téma, és sok fontos alkalmazással rendelkezik a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás területén. Szemantikus értékelés (SemEval) 2018 12. feladat "Az érvelés értelmezése" címmel elkötelezett a természetes nyelvi érvelés kutatására. Ebben a feladatban javasoltunk egy új érvelési értelmező rendszert, az ITNLP-ARC-ot, amely Neural Networks technológiát használ a probléma megoldására. Rendszerünkben az LSTM modell mind a premises mondatok, mind a parancs mondatok kódolására szolgál. A figyelemmodellt használjuk a két előfeltételes mondatvektor egyesítésére. A figyelemvektor és a két warrant vektor közötti hasonlóság összehasonlításával a rendszerünk végső válasza a nagyobb hasonlóságú vektor.', 'ka': "მიზეზი არის ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი თემა და აქვს ბევრი მნიშვნელოვანი პროცესის ფორმაში. Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' committed to research natural language reasoning. ამ დავალებში, ჩვენ ახალი არგუმენტის აზრუმენტის განსხვავება სისტემა, ITNLP-ARC, რომელიც გამოყენება ნეიროლური ქსელის ტექნოლოგია ამ პრობლემას გადაუწყვებას. ჩვენი სისტემაში, LSTM მოდელის შესახებ იქნება, რომ ორივე პრემიზიმის სიტყვები და შესახებ სიტყვების კოდირება. დაახლოების მოდელი გამოყენება ორი პრემიზიმის გვექტორის შეერთებაში. შემდგომარებით ახალგაზრულების გვექტორის და ორი დასაწყისი გვექტორის განსხვავებით, ჩვენ მივიღეთ ერთი უფრო მეტი განსხვავებული სისტემის ბოლო პასუხი.", 'it': "La ragione è un argomento molto importante e ha molte applicazioni importanti nel campo dell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Valutazione Semantica (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 'La comprensione della ragione dell'argomento' impegnata nella ricerca del ragionamento del linguaggio naturale. In questo compito, abbiamo proposto un nuovo sistema di comprensione del ragionamento argomentativo, ITNLP-ARC, che utilizza la tecnologia Neural Networks per risolvere questo problema. Nel nostro sistema, il modello LSTM è coinvolto per codificare sia le frasi premise che le sentenze di mandato. Il modello di attenzione viene utilizzato per unire i due vettori di frase preminenti. Confrontando la somiglianza tra il vettore dell'attenzione e ciascuno dei due vettori di warrant, scegliamo quello con maggiore somiglianza come risposta finale del nostro sistema.", 'lt': 'Motyvavimas yra labai svarbi tema ir turi daug svarbių taikymo sričių gamtos kalbų apdorojimo srityje. 2018 m. Semantinis vertinimas (SemEval) 12 užduotis „Argument ų pagrindimo supratimas“, skirta moksliniams tyrimams dėl gamtinės kalbos pagrindimo. Šiame uždavinyje pasiūlėme naują argument ą, pagrįstą supratimo sistema ITNLP-ARC, kuri naudoja Neuralinių tinklų technologiją šiai problemai išspręsti. Mūsų sistemoje naudojamas LSTM model is, kuriuo koduojami tiek įsakymai, tiek įsakymai. Atkreipiamojo dėmesio model is naudojamas sujungiant du sakinių pernešėjus. Palygindami dėmesio vektoriaus ir kiekvieno iš dviejų garantinių vektorių panašumą, mes pasirinksime tą, kuris yra didesnis panašumas kaip mūs ų sistemos galutinis atsakymas.', 'kk': "Негізгі - өте маңызды нақышы және табиғи тіл өңдеу өрісінде көп маңызды қолданбалар бар. Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' committed to research natural language reasoning. Бұл тапсырмада, біз бұл мәселеді шешу үшін нейрондық желік технологиясын пайдалану үшін жаңа аргументті түсіндіру жүйесін, ITNLP-ARC қолдандық. Біздің жүйемізде LSTM моделі премизациялық сөздерді және орантиялық сөздерді кодтау үшін қолданылады. Екі премизациялық векторды біріктіру үшін қолданылады. Біз біздің жүйеңіздің соңғы жауабыз ретінде болатын вектордың арасындағы ұқсастықтығын салыстырып, біз оны жүйеңіздің соңғы жауабыз деп таңдаймыз.", 'mk': 'Разумнувањето е многу важна тема и има многу важни апликации во областа на природното обработување јазик. Семантичка евалуација (SemEval) 2018 задача 12 „Разумирање на аргументот“ посветена на истражување на природното размислување на јазикот. In this task, we proposed a novel argument reasoning comprehension system, ITNLP-ARC, which use Neural Networks technology to solve this problem.  Во нашиот систем, ЛСТМ моделот е вклучен за кодирање на речениците и казните за налог. Моделот на внимание се користи за спојување на двата вектори на претходната реченица. Со споредба на сличноста помеѓу векторот на вниманието и секој од двата вектори на налог, го избираме оној со поголема сличност како последниот одговор на нашиот систем.', 'ms': "Alasan adalah topik yang sangat penting dan mempunyai banyak aplikasi penting dalam medan pemprosesan bahasa alam. Pemastian Semantik (SemEval) 2018 Tugas 12 'Pemahaman Memalaskan Argumen' berkomitmen untuk kajian alasan bahasa semulajadi. Dalam tugas ini, kami mencadangkan argumen baru tentang sistem pemahaman, ITNLP-ARC, yang menggunakan teknologi Rangkaian Neural untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini. Dalam sistem kita, model LSTM terlibat untuk mengekod kedua-dua kalimat premis dan kalimat waran. Model perhatian digunakan untuk gabung dua vektor perkataan preambus. Melalui membandingkan persamaan antara vektor perhatian dan setiap vektor dua waran, kita memilih satu dengan persamaan yang lebih tinggi sebagai jawapan terakhir sistem kita.", 'mt': "Ir-raġunament huwa suġġett importanti ħafna u għandu ħafna applikazzjonijiet importanti fil-qasam tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Evalwazzjoni Semantika (SemEval) 2018 Kompitu 12 'Il-Komprensjoni tar-Raġunar tal-Argument' impenjat ruħu għar-riċerka tar-raġunament tal-lingwa naturali. F’dan il-kompitu, ipproponejna argument ġdid li jirrazzjona s-sistema ta’ komprensjoni, ITNLP-ARC, li tuża t-teknoloġija tan-Netwerks Newrali biex issolvi din il-problema. Fis-sistema tagħna, il-mudell LSTM huwa involut biex jikkodifika kemm is-sentenzi premessa kif ukoll is-sentenzi tal-mandat. Il-mudell ta’ attenzjoni jintuża biex jingħaqdu ż-żewġ vetturi tas-sentenza premessa. Permezz tat-tqabbil tas-similarità bejn il-vettur tal-attenzjoni u kull wieħed miż-żewġ vetturi tal-garanzija, aħna nagħżlu dak b'similarità ogħla bħala t-tweġiba finali tas-sistema tagħna.", 'ml': "കാരണം വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിഷയം തന്നെയാണ്. സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d പല സെമാന്റിക് വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d (സെമ്എവാല്\u200d) 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12 'ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നത് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കുന്നത്' സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് ടെക്നോളജിക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d വാദ്യാഭ്യാസം പരിഹരിക്കുന്നതിനാ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d, LSTM മോഡല്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധ വാക്കുകളും വാറന്റ് വാക്കുകളും എന്\u200dകോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നതാണ്. ഈ ശ്രദ്ധ മോഡല്\u200d രണ്ട് മുന്നിലുള്ള വാക്ക് വെക്റ്ററുകളെ ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന് ശ്രദ്ധ വെക്റ്റര്\u200dക്കും രണ്ട് വാറന്റ് വെക്റ്റോര്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള തുല്യമായതിനാല്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ അവസാന ഉത്തരം എന്ന", 'no': 'Årsaken er eit veldig viktig emne og har mange viktige program i feltet for naturspråkshandtering. Semantisk evaluering (semiEval) 2018 Oppgåve 12 « The Argument Reasoning Comprehension » er tildelt til forskning av naturspråk. I denne oppgåva foreslåde vi eit nytt argumentasjonsforståkingssystem, ITNLP-ARC, som brukar neuralnettverk-teknologi for å løysa dette problemet. I systemet vårt er LSTM-modellen involvert for å koda både premise setningane og ordsetningane. Merknadsmodulen vert brukt for å fletta dei to premise setningsvectorane. Gjennom å samanlikna likheten mellom oppmerksvektoren og kvar av dei to garantvektorane, vel vi den med høgare likheten som siste svaret.', 'pl': 'Rozumowanie jest bardzo ważnym tematem i ma wiele ważnych zastosowań w dziedzinie przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Ocena semantyczna (SemEval) 2018 Zadanie 12 "Rozumienie argumentów" zobowiązane do badań rozumowania języka naturalnego. W tym zadaniu zaproponowaliśmy nowy system rozumienia argumentów, ITNLP-ARC, który wykorzystuje technologię sieci neuronowych do rozwiązania tego problemu. W naszym systemie model LSTM jest zaangażowany do kodowania zarówno zdań założonych, jak i wyroków nakazowych. Model uwagi służy do połączenia dwóch wektorów zdań założonych. Poprzez porównanie podobieństwa między wektorem uwagi a każdym z dwóch wektorów warancji, wybieramy ten o większym podobieństwie jako ostateczną odpowiedź naszego systemu.', 'mn': "Харин шалтгаан нь маш чухал сэдэв. Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн талаар олон чухал хэрэглээ байгаа. Semantic Eval (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' гэдэг нь байгалийн хэл ойлголтын судалгаанд зориулсан. Энэ ажил дээр бид шинэ аргументын ойлголтын систем, ITNLP-ARC, энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд мэдрэлийн сүлжээний технологи ашигладаг. Бидний системд LSTM загвар нь аль нэг үг болон шаардлагатай үг хоёуланг шинэчлэхэд холбоотой. Анхаарал загвар нь хоёр давхар векторуудыг нэгтгэхэд хэрэглэгддэг. Анхаарлын векторын хоорондын тэнцүү байдлыг харьцуулахад бид системийн эцсийн хариулт гэж илүү өндөр тэнцүү байдлыг сонгож байна.", 'ro': 'Raționarea este un subiect foarte important și are multe aplicații importante în domeniul procesării limbajului natural. Evaluarea Semantică (SemEval) 2018 Sarcina 12 "Înțelegerea raționamentului argumentelor" se angajează să cerceteze raționamentul limbajului natural. În această sarcină, am propus un nou sistem de înțelegere a argumentelor, ITNLP-ARC, care utilizează tehnologia Rețelelor Neurale pentru a rezolva această problemă. În sistemul nostru, modelul LSTM este implicat în codificarea atât a propozițiilor de premisă, cât și a propozițiilor de mandat. Modelul atenției este folosit pentru a fuziona cei doi vectori de propoziție premisă. Prin compararea similarității dintre vectorul atenției și fiecare dintre cei doi vectori de mandat, alegem cel cu similaritate mai mare ca răspuns final al sistemului nostru.', 'sr': "Razlog je veoma važna tema i ima mnogo važnih aplikacija u oblasti prirodnog obrade jezika. Semantička procjena (SemEval) 2018. zadatak 12 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension' obavezan za istraživanje prirodnog jezika. U ovom zadatku smo predložili novi sistem razumijevanja argumentacija, ITNLP-ARC, koji koristi neuronske mreže tehnologije kako bi rešili ovaj problem. U našem sistemu, LSTM model je uključen da kodira i kazne iz premijere i kazne o nalogu. Model pažnje se koristi za spojiti dve vektore kazne. Uspoređujući sličnost između vektora pažnje i svakog od dva vektora naloga, odaberemo jednu sa višem sličnošću kao konačni odgovor našeg sistema.", 'so': "Sababtu waa arin aad u muhiim ah islamarkaasna waxay leedahay codsiyooyin badan oo muhiim ah ee ku yaala beerta baaraandegista luqada dabiicadda ah. Qiimeynta galmada (SemEval) 2018 Shaqada 12 'Heshiiska heshiiska arimaha' waxaa lagu sameeyay waxbarashada sababta afka dabiiciga ah. Shaqadan, waxaan soo jeednay qoraal warqad ah oo ku saabsan kooxaha, ITNLP-ARC, kaas oo isticmaalaya teknolojiyada Neural Network si ay u xalliso dhibaatadan. Isticmaalka LSTM waxaa ka mid ah mid ku qoran qoraalka hore iyo xuquuqda ogolaanshiyaha. Tusaalada daryeelka waxaa loo isticmaalaa in la isku daro labada waddooyinka hore ee ku qoran. Si siman ugu dhexeeya vectorka xanaaneynta iyo labada wado oo warqada ah, waxaynu dooranaynaa mid isla mid ah jawaabta ugu dambeysa ee nidaamka.", 'sv': 'Resonemang är ett mycket viktigt ämne och har många viktiga tillämpningar inom området naturlig språkbehandling. Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Uppgift 12 "The Argument Reasoning Comprehension" har åtagit sig att undersöka naturligt språkresonemang. I denna uppgift föreslog vi ett nytt argumentresonemangssystem, ITNLP-ARC, som använder Neural Networks teknik för att lösa detta problem. I vårt system används LSTM-modellen för att koda både premissmeningarna och häktningsdomarna. Uppmärksamhetsmodellen används för att sammanfoga de två premissmeningsvektorerna. Genom att jämföra likheten mellan uppmärksamhetsvektorn och var och en av de två warrantvektorerna väljer vi den med högre likhet som vårt systems slutliga svar.', 'si': "හේතුව තමයි ගොඩක් වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණය (සෙම්වේල්) 2018 කාර්ය 12 'The argment Reasoning Comprevension' කිරීමට ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ITNLP-ARC, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලවාර්ක් තා අපේ පද්ධතියේ LSTM මොඩල් එක්ක ඇතුළත් වෙනවා ප්\u200dරධාන වචන සහ වාර්න්ට් වචන දෙන්නම් සංකේත කරන්න. ප්\u200dරධාන වෙක්ටර් දෙකක් එකතු කරන්න අවධානයක් භාවිත කරයි. අවධානය වෙක්ටර් සහ වෙක්ටර් දෙකක් අතර සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර් එක්ක අතර සම්බන්ධ විදියට, අපි පද්ධතියේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතික්ර", 'ur': "Reasoning is a very important topic and has many important applications in the field of natural language processing. Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' committed to research natural language reasoning. اس کام میں ہم نے ایک نئی اروپانی کی نظریہ سمجھانے والی سیسٹم، ITNLP-ARC کی پیشنهاد کی جو اس مشکل کو حل کرنے کے لئے نیورال نیٹورک ٹیکنالوجی استعمال کرتا ہے. ہمارے سیسٹم میں، LSTM موڈل دونوں جماعتوں اور واورنٹ جماعتوں کو کوڈ کرنے کے لئے شامل ہے۔ دکھانے کی مدل دو نمائش ویکتروں کو جمع کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. توجه ویکتور اور دونوں اورانٹ ویکتروں کے درمیان برابری کے مطابق ہم ایک کو بلند برابری کے مطابق انتخاب کرتے ہیں", 'ta': "காரணம் மிகவும் முக்கியமான தலைப்பு மற்றும் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்பாட்டின் புலத்தில் பல முக்கியமான பயன்பா செமாண்டிக் மதிப்பு (SemEval) 2018 பணி 12 'ஆராய்ந்த மொழிக்கான முடிவு' ஆராய்ச்சி காரணங்களுக்கு செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது. இந்த பணியில், நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய தருமதிப்பு கூட்டு தொகுதி அமைப்பு, ITNLP-ARC, அது நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல் தொழில்நுட்பம் பயன்படுத எங்கள் கணினியில், LSTM மாதிரி முன்னோட்டு வாக்கியங்களையும் வாக்குறியீட்டு வாக்கியங்களையும் குறியீட்ட இந்த கவனத்தின் மாதிரி இரண்டு முன்னோட்டு வாக்கு நெறிகளை ஒன்றிணைக்க பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. கவனத்தின் நெறிக்கும் ஒவ்வொரு வாரன்ட் வெக்டாருக்கும் இடையேயும் ஒப்பிடும் மூலம், நாம் ஒன்றை அதிக சமமாக தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோ", 'uz': "Chunki o'qish juda muhim mavzu va asl tilni boshqarish maydonidagi juda muhim dasturlar bor. Comment Bu vazifanda biz bu muammolani olish uchun novel argumentni anglatdik, ITNLP-ARC, yani Neural Network texnologiyani ishlatish uchun. Bizning tizimimizda LSTM modeli birinchi so'zlar va ruxsat soʻzlarini kodlash uchun ishlatiladi. Name Biz bir narsa tizimning oxirgi javob sifatida bir qiymati va ikkita vaqt vektorining orasidagi teng bo'lishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Lý luận là một chủ đề rất quan trọng và có rất nhiều ứng dụng quan trọng trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tập đoàn đánh giá trung học tại Tập đoàn Điều tra 98 Tập đoàn Suy luận nhằm hướng dẫn nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống hiểu biết lý lẽ lập luận mới, ITNLP-ARC, dùng công nghệ về mạng thần kinh để giải quyết vấn đề này. Trong hệ thống của chúng tôi, mô hình LSD được liên quan đến để mã hóa cả các câu tiền đề và các câu lệnh bắt. The attention Modern is used to joint the two preion terms vectors. Khi so s ánh sự giống nhau giữa véc- tơ chú ý và mỗi hai cùng cỗ máy có trát, chúng tôi chọn cái có nét giống nhau cao hơn là câu trả lời cuối cùng của hệ thống.', 'bg': 'Разумяването е много важна тема и има много важни приложения в областта на обработката на естествения език. Задача 12 "Разбиране на аргументите за разсъждаване", посветена на изследването на разсъжденията на естествения език. В тази задача предложихме нова система за разбиране на аргументите, която използва технологията за решаване на този проблем. В нашата система моделът LSTM е включен за кодиране както на предпоставките изречения, така и на присъдите за заповед. Моделът на вниманието се използва за сливане на двата вектора на изречение. Чрез сравняване на сходството между вектора на вниманието и всеки от двата вектора на гаранцията, ние избираме този с по-голяма сходство за окончателен отговор на нашата система.', 'hr': "Razlog je vrlo važna tema i ima mnogo važnih primjena u oblasti obrade prirodnog jezika. Semantička procjena (semiEval) 2018. zadatak 12 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension' posvećen istraživanju prirodnog jezika. U ovom zadatku smo predložili novi sistem razumijevanja argumentacija, ITNLP-ARC, koji koristi neuronske mreže tehnologije kako bi riješili ovaj problem. U našem sustavu, LSTM model je uključen za kodiranje primjerne kazne i kazne o nalogu. Model pažnje se koristi za spojiti dvije vektore kazne. Uspoređujući sličnost između vektora pažnje i svakog od dva vektora naloga, odaberemo jednu s višim sličnostima kao konačni odgovor našeg sustava.", 'de': 'Vernunft ist ein sehr wichtiges Thema und hat viele wichtige Anwendungen im Bereich der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Aufgabe 12 "Das Argument Reasoning Comprehension" widmet sich der Erforschung natürlicher Sprache. In dieser Aufgabe haben wir ein neuartiges Argumentationsverständnissystem, ITNLP-ARC, vorgeschlagen, das die Technologie von Neuronalen Netzwerken verwendet, um dieses Problem zu lösen. In unserem System ist das LSTM-Modell involviert, um sowohl die Prämissenzsätze als auch die Haftbefehle zu codieren. Das Aufmerksamkeitsmodell wird verwendet, um die beiden Prämissesatzvektoren zusammenzuführen. Durch den Vergleich der Ähnlichkeit zwischen dem Aufmerksamkeitsvektor und jedem der beiden Warrantvektoren wählen wir den mit höherer Ähnlichkeit als endgültige Antwort unseres Systems.', 'nl': "Redenen is een zeer belangrijk onderwerp en heeft veel belangrijke toepassingen op het gebied van natuurlijke taalverwerking. Semantische Evaluatie (SemEval) 2018 Taak 12 'Het Argument Reasoning Comprehension' zet zich in voor onderzoek naar natuurlijke taal redeneren. In deze taak hebben we een nieuw argument redeneering begrijpingssysteem voorgesteld, ITNLP-ARC, dat gebruik maakt van Neural Networks technologie om dit probleem op te lossen. In ons systeem is het LSTM model betrokken om zowel de vooronderstellingen als de dwangzinnen te coderen. Het aandachtsmodel wordt gebruikt om de twee uitgangszinnenvectoren samen te voegen. Door de gelijkenis tussen de aandachtsvector en elk van de twee warrantvectoren te vergelijken, kiezen we degene met hogere gelijkenis als definitief antwoord van ons systeem.", 'da': "Begrundelse er et meget vigtigt emne og har mange vigtige applikationer inden for naturlig sprogbehandling. Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Opgave 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' forpligtet til at undersøge naturligt sprog ræsonnement. I denne opgave foreslog vi et nyt argument ræsonnement forståelse system, ITNLP-ARC, som bruger Neural Networks teknologi til at løse dette problem. I vores system er LSTM-modellen involveret i at kode både præmissesætningerne og kendelsesdommene. Opmærksomhedsmodellen bruges til at flette de to forudsætningsvektorer. Ved at sammenligne ligheden mellem opmærksomhedsvektoren og hver af de to warrantvektorer, vælger vi den med højere lighed som vores systems endelige svar.", 'id': "Alasan adalah topik yang sangat penting dan memiliki banyak aplikasi penting dalam bidang proses bahasa alam. Evaluasi Semantik (SemEval) 2018 Tugas 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' berkomitmen untuk penelitian alasan bahasa alami. Dalam tugas ini, kami mengusulkan argumen baru yang mengagumkan sistem pemahaman, ITNLP-ARC, yang menggunakan teknologi Networks Neural untuk memecahkan masalah ini. Dalam sistem kita, model LSTM terlibat untuk mengkode kedua kalimat premise dan kalimat surat perintah. Model perhatian digunakan untuk menggabungkan dua vektor kalimat pernyataan. Melalui membandingkan persamaan antara vektor perhatian dan masing-masing dari dua vektor warrant, kita memilih satu dengan persamaan yang lebih tinggi sebagai jawaban akhir sistem kita.", 'fa': "Reasoning is a very important topic and has many important applications in the field of natural language processing. ارزیابی Semantic (SemEval) Task 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' committed to research natural language reasoning. در این وظیفه، ما پیشنهاد دادیم یک دلیل جدید برای درک کردن سیستم درک، ITNLP-ARC، که از تکنولوژی شبکه\u200cهای عصبی برای حل این مشکل استفاده می\u200cکند. در سیستم ما، مدل LSTM درگیر است که هر دو جمله\u200cهای پیشینه و جمله\u200cهای حکم را رمز کند. مدل توجه برای جمع کردن دو ویکتور مجموعه استفاده می\u200cشود. از طریق مقایسه کردن شبیه بین ویکتور توجه و هر دو ویکتور حکم، یکی را با شبیه بالاتر به عنوان پاسخ نهایی سیستم ما انتخاب می کنیم.", 'tr': 'Sebäbi örän wajyp meýdança we tebigy dil işlemekde köp wajyp program bar. Semantik Taýýarlama (SemEval) 2018 Görev 12 Bu işde biz bu meseleni çözmek üçin täze bir argument düşünmesini teklip etdik. Sistemimizde, LSTM nusgasy hem başlangyç sözleri hem garanty sözleri kodlamak üçin goşulýar. Dikkat Modeli iki ön jümet vektörünü birleştirmek için kullanılır Dikkati vektörü ve her iki garant vektörü arasındaki benzerini karşılaştırarak, sistemimizin son cevabı olarak daha yüksek benzerini seçiyoruz.', 'sw': "Reasoning is a very important topic and has many important applications in the field of natural language processing.  Uchunguzi wa SemEval (SemEval) 2018 Kazi 12 'Uchambuzi wa Msimu wa Kusoma Msingi' uliofanywa na tafiti kwa sababu za lugha asili. Katika kazi hii, tulipendekeza mjadala wa riwaya unaoelezea mfumo wa kompyuta, ITNLP-ARC, ambao unatumia teknolojia ya Mtandao wa Neural ili kutatua tatizo hili. Katika mfumo wetu, Mradi wa LSTM unahusisha kuingiza hukumu za awali na hukumu hiyo. Mfano wa ufuatiliaji unatumiwa kuunganisha vector mbili za muhimu. Kwa kulinganisha usawa kati ya vector ya uchunguzi na moja ya vectori mbili za vita, tunachagua moja kwa moja kama jibu la mwisho la mfumo wetu.", 'ko': "추리는 매우 중요한 과제로 자연 언어 처리 분야에서 많은 중요한 응용을 하고 있다.어의평가(SemEval) 2018년 미션 12'논거 추리 이해'는 자연 언어 추리를 연구하는 데 주력했다.이 임무에서 우리는 새로운 논점 추리 이해 시스템인 ITNLP-ARC를 제기했는데 이것은 신경 네트워크 기술을 사용하여 이 문제를 해결한다.저희 시스템에서 LSTM 모델은 전제문과 보증문을 인코딩하는 데 사용됩니다.주의 모형은 두 전제 문장의 벡터를 통합하는 데 사용됩니다.벡터와 두 권한 수여 벡터 간의 유사성을 비교함으로써 우리는 유사성이 비교적 높은 것을 시스템의 최종 답안으로 선택했다.", 'af': "Redigering is 'n baie belangrike onderwerp en het baie belangrike toepassings in die veld van natuurlike taal verwerking. Semantiese Evaluasie (SemEval) 2018 Opdrag 12 'Die Argument Reasoning Comprehension' geantwoord na reseksie natuurlike taal redensie. In hierdie taak het ons 'n nuwe argumentasie voorgestel wat verstaan stelsel, ITNLP-ARC, wat neurale netwerk teknologie gebruik om hierdie probleem te los. In ons stelsel is die LSTM model ingesluit om beide die premise setings en die waarskuwing te kodeer. Name Deur die vergelyking van die gelykenis tussen die aandagvektor en elke van die twee waarskuwingvektore, kies ons die een met hoër gelykenis as ons stelsel se eindelike antwoord.", 'sq': "Arsyeja është një temë shumë e rëndësishme dhe ka shumë aplikime të rëndësishme në fushën e procesimit natyror të gjuhës. Vlerësimi Semantik (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' committed to research natural language reasoning. In this task, we proposed a novel argument reasoning comprehension system, ITNLP-ARC, which use Neural Networks technology to solve this problem.  Në sistemin tonë, modeli LSTM është përfshirë për të koduar si dënimet e paragjykimit dhe dënimet e mandatit. Modeli i vëmendjes përdoret për të bashkuar dy vektorët e fjalëve të premtueshme. Nëpërmjet krahasimit të ngjashmërisë midis vektorit të vëmendjes dhe secilit prej dy vektorëve të mandatit, ne zgjedhim atë me ngjashmëri më të lartë si përgjigjen përfundimtare të sistemit tonë.", 'hy': 'Պատճառը շատ կարևոր թեմա է և ունի շատ կարևոր ծրագրեր բնական լեզվի վերլուծության ոլորտում: 2018 թ.-ի սեմանտիկ գնահատումը (Սեմէվալ) 12-րդ հանձնարարությունը "Արգեմին ընդունելու ընկալումը" ներգրավված է բնական լեզվի բանավեճի ուսումնասիրությանը: Այս խնդրի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկեցինք նոր բանավեճ, որը մտածում է հասկացության համակարգը, ITNSP-ARC, որը օգտագործում է Նեյրալ ցանցերի տեխնոլոգիան այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար: Մեր համակարգում LSMT-ի մոդելը ներգրավված է նախադասությունների և պատվիրավոր դասությունների կոդավորման համար: The attention model is used to merge the two premise sentence vectors.  Համեմատելով ուշադրության վեկտորի և երկու պատվիրավոր վեկտորներից յուրաքանչյուրի նմանությունը, մենք ընտրում ենք մեկը, որն ավելի նման է մեր համակարգի վերջին պատասխանին:', 'bn': "প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার ক্ষেত্রে অনেক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিষয় এবং অনেক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অ্যাপলিকেশন আছে। সেম্যান্টিক মূল্যায়ন (সেমভাল) ২০১৮ কাজের ১২ 'আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরুদ্ধার করা' প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার গবেষণার কারণে প্রকৃতিক ভ এই কাজে আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের যুক্তি প্রস্তাব করেছিলাম, যেটি এই সমস্যা সমাধান করতে নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করে। আমাদের সিস্টেমে এলস্টিএম মডেলটি প্রাথমিক শাস্তি এবং ওয়ারেন্টের বাক্যের উভয়ে এনকোড করার জন্য জড়িত। এই মনোযোগ মডেলটি দুটি প্রথম বাক্যের ভেক্টর একত্রিত করার জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়। মনোযোগ ভেক্টর এবং প্রত্যেকটি ওয়ারেন্ট ভেক্টরের মধ্যে একই রকমের মাধ্যমে আমরা বেছে নিয়েছি সিস্টেমের শেষ উত্তর হিসেবে।", 'az': "Reasoning is a very important topic and has many important applications in the field of natural language processing. Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' committed to research natural language reasoning. Bu iŇüd…ô, biz bu problemi √ß…ôkm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn n√∂ral Networks teknolojisini istifad…ô ed…ôn yeni argumenti anlama sistemi, ITNLP-ARC t…ôklif etdik. Sistemimizd…ô, LSTM modeli h…ôr ikisinin …ôvv…ôlki c√ľml…ôl…ôrini v…ô warrant c√ľml…ôl…ôrini kodlamaq √ľ√ß√ľn iŇütirak edir. ńįki …ôvv…ôlki s√∂zl…ô vekt√∂r√ľn√ľ birl…ôŇüdirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn g√∂zl…ôm…ô modeli qullanńĪlńĪr. Dinl…ôm…ô vektoru v…ô h…ôr iki warrantlńĪ vektoru arasńĪndakńĪ b…ônz…ôri il…ô sistemimizin son cavabńĪ kimi daha y√ľks…ôk b…ônz…ôri il…ô se√ßirik.", 'am': "አካሄዱ እጅግ አስፈላጊ ጉዳይ ነው፣ እናም በፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል እርሻ ብዙ አስፈላጊ ፕሮግራሞች አሉ፡፡ የስምናኒክ አውቶማቲ (SemEval) 2018 ስራ 12 'አርጉም አቀማመጥ አቀማመጥ' ለፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስታወቂያ ምክንያት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የኔural ኔትርክ ቴክኖክቲክን ለመፍታት የሚችሉትን የመጠቀም አዋጅ አዋቂዎችን አቀረብን፡፡ በሲስተም፣ LSTM ሞዴል የፊደል ቃላት እና የፍርድ ፍርድ መሆኑን ማክበር ነው፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች እና በሁለቱ የwarrant vector s መካከል በሚመስል እና በጥያቄ እና በሥርዓታችን የመጨረሻው መልስ እንደሚመስል አንዱን እንመርጣለን፡፡", 'bs': "Razlog je vrlo važna tema i ima mnogo važnih primjena u oblasti obrade prirodnog jezika. Semantička procjena (semiEval) 2018. zadatak 12 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension' posvećen istraživanju prirodnog jezika. U ovom zadatku smo predložili novi sistem razumijevanja argumentacija, ITNLP-ARC, koji koristi neuronske mreže tehnologije kako bi riješili ovaj problem. U našem sustavu, LSTM model je uključen da kodira i kazne za premijeru i kazne za nalog. Model pažnje se koristi za spajanje dva vektora kazne. Uspoređujući sličnost između vektora pažnje i svakog od dva vektora naloga, odaberemo jednu sa višem sličnošću kao konačni odgovor našeg sistema.", 'ca': "La raonació és un tema molt important i té moltes aplicacions importants en el camp del processament natural de llenguatges. Evaluació Semàtica (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' es va comprometre a investigar el raonament natural del llenguatge. En aquesta tasca vam proposar un nou argument raonant el sistema de comprensió, ITNLP-ARC, que utilitzen la tecnologia Neural Networks per resoldre aquest problem a. En el nostre sistema, el model LSTM està involucrat en codificar les frases premises i les frases de mandat. El model d'atenció s'utilitza per fusionar els dos vectors de frases premises. A través de la comparació de la similitud entre el vector d'atenció i cada un dels dos vectors de mandat, escollim el que té més similitud com la resposta final del nostre sistema.", 'fi': 'Järjestely on erittäin tärkeä aihe ja sillä on monia tärkeitä sovelluksia luonnonkielen käsittelyn alalla. Semanttinen arviointi (SemEval) 2018 Tehtävä 12 "Argument Reasoning Comprehension" sitoutui tutkimaan luonnollisen kielen päättelyä. Tässä työssä ehdotimme uutta argumenttien päättelyn ymmärtämisjärjestelmää, ITNLP-ARC, joka käyttää hermoverkkotekniikkaa ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Järjestelmässämme LSTM-malli koodaa sekä lähtölauseet että etsintälauseet. Huomiomallia käytetään yhdistämään kaksi oletuslausevektoria. Vertaamalla huomiovektorin ja molempien warrant-vektorien samankaltaisuutta valitsemme järjestelmämme lopulliseksi vastaukseksi sen, jolla on suurempi samankaltaisuus.', 'et': 'Mõtlemine on väga oluline teema ja sellel on palju olulisi rakendusi looduskeele töötlemise valdkonnas. Semantiline hindamine (SemEval) 2018. aasta ülesanne 12 "Argumenti mõistmise arusaam" on pühendunud looduskeele mõtlemise uurimisele. Selles ülesandes pakkusime välja uue argumentide arusaamise süsteemi ITNLP-ARC, mis kasutab neurovõrkude tehnoloogiat selle probleemi lahendamiseks. Meie süsteemis on LSTM mudel kaasatud nii eelduselausete kui ka orderi lausete kodeerimiseks. Tähelepanu mudelit kasutatakse kahe eelduselausevektori ühendamiseks. Võrreldes tähelepanu vektori ja mõlema garantii vektori sarnasust, valime süsteemi lõplikuks vastuseks suurema sarnasusega vektori.', 'cs': 'Rozumování je velmi důležité téma a má mnoho důležitých aplikací v oblasti zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Sémantické hodnocení (SemEval) 2018 Úkol 12 "Rozumění argumentů odůvodnění" se zabývá výzkumem uvažování přirozeného jazyka. V tomto úkolu jsme navrhli nový systém porozumění argumentů, ITNLP-ARC, který využívá technologie neuronových sítí k řešení tohoto problému. V našem systému je model LSTM zapojen k kódování jak předpokladních trestů, tak rozsudků zatykače. Model pozornosti se používá k sloučení dvou předpokladních vektorů vět. Porovnáním podobnosti mezi vektorem pozornosti a každým ze dvou příkazových vektorů zvolíme ten s vyšší podobností jako konečnou odpověď našeho systému.', 'jv': 'Mbok semanti Validity Nang task nyoe, dino nambah un barêng dumaten sing wis ana perusahaan sistèm akeh luwih nêmên, IBNLP-ARC, ngêmên iso ngéwé teknêlogi Neral Network ngêmên ngêmên kuwi bisa nêmên kuwi etibarêl. Nang Sistem-awak dhéwé, modèl LA-M iki dadi nggo kode awak dhéwé kabèh sing luwih nyong lan mbukak sing dirampen vectors-action Out of the question mark', 'sk': 'Razumljanje je zelo pomembna tema in ima veliko pomembnih aplikacij na področju obdelave naravnega jezika. Semantna evalvacija (SemEval) 2018 Naloga 12 "Razumevanje argumentov razumevanja" se je zavezala raziskovanju razumevanja naravnega jezika. V tej nalogi smo predlagali nov sistem razumevanja argumentov, ITNLP-ARC, ki uporablja tehnologijo nevronskih omrežij za reševanje tega problema. V našem sistemu je model LSTM vključen za kodiranje tako premičnih stavkov kot tudi nalog stavkov. Model pozornosti se uporablja za združitev dveh vektorjev stavkov predpostavk. S primerjavo podobnosti med vektorjem pozornosti in vsakim od dveh vektorjev warranta izberemo tistega z večjo podobnostjo kot končni odgovor našega sistema.', 'ha': "Reasoning is a very important topic and has many important applications in the field of natural language processing.  @ item: inmenu Text Completion Daga wannan aikin, mun buɗa wata jayayya ta yanzu da fassarar da fassara, ATNLP-ArC, wanda ke yi amfani da Technical Networks na Neural zuwa solar wannan mataimaki. Daga cikinmu, misalin LSSM na haɗi a cikin kodi da cire-gabatar da cire-gareshi. @ info Ina sami da daidaita a tsakanin shiryarwa masu kiyaye da duk masu shiryi biyu, za mu zãɓi wannan da ke da misãli mafi girma kamar jibin ƙarshen na'uranmu.", 'he': 'הגיון הוא נושא חשוב מאוד ויש לו שימושים חשובים רבים בתחום עיבוד שפה טבעי. הערכה סמנטית (SemEval) 2018 משימה 12 "הבנה הגיונית הטבעית" התחייבה למחקר הגיוני שפה טבעית. במשימה הזאת הצענו טיעון חדש שמסביר מערכת הבנה, ITNLP-ARC, אשר משתמש בטכנולוגיה רשתות נוירואליות לפתור את הבעיה הזאת. במערכת שלנו, מודל LSTM מעורב כדי לקוד גם את משפטי המטבע וגם את משפטי הצו. דוגמנית תשומת לב משתמשת כדי למשוך את שני ווקטורי המשפטים המתאימים. באמצעות השוואה של הדמיון בין ווקטור תשומת לב לכל אחד משני ווקטורי צו, אנחנו בוחרים את אחד עם דמיון גבוה יותר כהתשובה האחרונה של המערכת שלנו.', 'bo': "རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་གནད་དོན་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་རང་རུང་སྒེར་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས Semantic Evaluation (SemEval) 2018 Task 12 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension' committed to research natural language reasoning. In this task, we proposed a novel argument reasoning comprehension system, ITNLP-ARC, which use Neural Networks technology to solve this problem. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ནང་དུ་LSTM་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྣམ་དང་བརྡ་གཏན་རྟགས སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འདི་དག་གི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་མཐུན"}
{'en': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : An End-to-End Attention-based Neural Network for the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'ar': 'ECNU في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: شبكة عصبية قائمة على الاهتمام من البداية إلى النهاية لمهمة فهم التفكير المنطقي', 'fr': "ECNU au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 12\xa0: Un réseau de neurones basé sur l'attention de bout en bout pour la tâche de compréhension du raisonnement d'argument", 'pt': 'ECNU no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: Uma Rede Neural Baseada em Atenção de Ponta a Ponta para a Tarefa de Compreensão de Raciocínio de Argumentos', 'es': 'ECNU en la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2018: Una red neuronal integral basada en la atención para la tarea de comprensión del razonamiento de argumentos', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のECNUタスク12 ：議論の推論理解タスクのためのエンドツーエンドのアテンションベースのニューラルネットワーク', 'zh': '华东师范大学在SemEval-2018务12:论理解之端,基于注意之神经网络', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 12 पर ECNU: तर्क तर्क समझ कार्य के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'ECNU на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Сквозная нейронная сеть на основе внимания для задачи понимания аргументации', 'ga': 'ECNU ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: Líonra Néarach Bunaithe ar Aire ó cheann ceann go ceann don Tasc Tuisceana ar Réasúnaíocht Argóint', 'ka': 'ECNU SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 12: დასრულება დასრულებული ნეიროლური ქსელი არგუმენტების მიზეზების კომპრენციო პარამეტრი', 'hu': 'ECNU a SemEval-2018 12. feladaton: Egy végpontos figyelem-alapú neurorális hálózat az érvelési értelmezési feladathoz', 'el': 'Καθήκον 12: Ένα Νευρικό Δίκτυο με βάση την προσοχή που βασίζεται στην κατανόηση επιχειρημάτων', 'it': "ECNU al SemEval-2018 Task 12: Una rete neurale end-to-end basata sull'attenzione per il compito di comprensione della ragione degli argomenti", 'kk': 'ECNU 12 тапсырмасында: Аргументтердің себебін түсіндіру тапсырмасының аяқтау-аяқтау негіздеген нейрондық желі', 'lt': 'ECNU 2018 m. pusmečio vertinimo 12 užduotis: Tarpiniu dėmesiu grindžiamas neuralinis tinklas, skirtas argumentams pagrįsti', 'mk': 'ЕКНУ на полуевал 2018 задача 12: Неурална мрежа базирана на конечно внимание за задачата за разбирање на аргументите', 'ms': 'ECNU pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Rangkaian Neural berasaskan Perhatian Akhir-Akhir untuk Tugas Pemahaman Memakai Argumen', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയിലെ എസിനു', 'no': 'ECNU på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 12: Ein ende-til-slutt attensjonsbasert neuralnettverk for oppgåva for argument-grunnleggjande komprehension', 'mn': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An End-to-End Attention-based Neural Network for the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'pl': 'ECNU w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Kompleksowa sieć neuronowa oparta na uwadze dla zadania zrozumienia argumentów', 'mt': 'ECNU f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 12: Netwerk newrali bbażat fuq l-Attenzjoni minn tmiem sa tmiem għall-kompitu ta’ komprensjoni għar-raġunament tal-argumenti', 'sr': 'ECNU na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: Neuralna mreža koja je osnovana na kraju do kraja pažnje za zadatak o osvajanju argumentacija', 'si': 'ECNA at semeval-2018 Job 12: A End-to-End Attension-based neural network', 'so': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A End-to-End Attention-based Neural Network for the Argument Reading Complementation Task', 'ro': 'ECNU la SemEval-2018 Task 12: O rețea neurală completă bazată pe atenție pentru activitatea de înțelegere a argumentelor', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் ECNU 12: ஆரம்ப பொருள் முடிவு செய்யும் செயல்', 'ur': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An End-to-End Attention-based Neural Network for the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'sv': 'ECNU på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: Ett heltäckande uppmärksamhetsbaserat neuralt nätverk för diskussionsuppgiften', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Điện hạ tại nhiệm vụ SemEvl-208: Một mạng thần kinh đặt đầy đủ vào cuối để đặt chú ý cho nhiệm vụ Bàn luận về lý luận lý.', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Цялостна неврална мрежа, основана на вниманието, за задачата за разбиране на аргументите', 'nl': 'ECNU bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Een end-to-end attentie-gebaseerd neuronaal netwerk voor de argument redening comprehension taak', 'da': 'ECNU på SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Et end-to-end opmærksomhedsbaseret neuralt netværk til argumentbegrundelse forståelse opgave', 'hr': 'ECNU na zadatku 12: Neuralna mreža osnovana na kraju do kraja pažnje za zadatak o osvajanju argumentacija', 'id': 'ECNU di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Jaringan Neural Berdasarkan Akhir-Akhir Perhatian untuk Tugas Pemahaman Argumen', 'de': 'ECNU bei SemEval-2018 Task 12: Ein aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes neuronales Netzwerk für die Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'ko': 'ECNU가 SemEval-18 퀘스트 12: 추리 이해 퀘스트를 논증하는 데 사용되는 끝에서 끝까지 신경 네트워크 주의', 'fa': 'ECNU در ماموریت ۱۲۰۸: یک شبکه عصبی بنیاد پایان به پایان توجه برای ماموریت تأکید دلیل دلیل توجه', 'sw': 'ECNU kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Mtandao wa Neural wa Kusoma Ufunguzi', 'af': 'ECNU by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 12: 芒聙聶n Einde-na-Einde Aangaande-gebaseerde Neuralnetwerk', 'am': 'ስራ 12:', 'sq': 'ECNU në SemEval-2018 Task 12: An End-to-End Attention-Based Neural Network for the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'tr': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An End-to-End Attention-based Neural Network for the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'hy': 'ԷԿՆԱ-ը 2018-ի կիսագնդի 12. հանձնարարում. ուշադրության վերջ-վերջ հիմնված նյարդային ցանց', 'az': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An End-to-End Attention-based Neural Network for the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task', 'bs': 'ECNU na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: Neuralna mreža koja je osnovana na kraju do kraja pažnje za zadatak o osvajanju argumentacija', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১২: আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরুত্থানের কাজের জন্য একটি শেষ-থেকে শেষ পর্যবেক্ষণ ভিত্তিক নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'fi': 'ECNU SemEval-2018 Task 12: Kattava huomiopohjainen hermoverkosto argumenttien järkeilyn ymmärtämistä varten', 'cs': 'ECNU na SemEval-2018 Úkol 12: End-to-End neuronová síť založená na pozornosti pro úkol pochopení argumentů', 'et': 'ECNU SemEval-2018 ülesandel 12: Tähelepanu põhinev neurovõrk argumentide mõistmise ülesande täitmiseks', 'ca': 'ECNU a SemEval-2018 tasca 12: Una xarxa neuronal basada en la atenció fins al final per a la tasca de comprensió basada en arguments', 'he': 'ECNU ב-SemEval-2018 משימה 12: רשת נוירולית מבוססת על תשומת לב סוף-סוף', 'jv': 'ESNU at semi-2020 task 12', 'ha': 'ECNU at SemEl-2018 Tafiyar 12: An End-to-End Attitory-based Neural Networkspace for the Argument Restart Comprehension Tafiyar', 'sk': 'ECNU na nalogi 12 SemEval-2018: celovita nevronska mreža, ki temelji na pozornosti, za nalogo razumevanja argumentov', 'bo': 'ECNU at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An End-to-End Attention-based Neural Network for the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task'}
{'en': 'This paper presents our submissions to SemEval 2018 Task 12 : the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. We investigate an end-to-end attention-based neural network to represent the two lexically close candidate warrants. On the one hand, we extract their different parts as attention vectors to obtain distinguishable representations. On the other hand, we use their surrounds (i.e., claim, reason, debate context) as another attention vectors to get contextual representations, which work as final clues to select the correct warrant. Our model achieves 60.4 % accuracy and ranks 3rd among 22 participating systems.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة تقديماتنا إلى SemEval 2018 Task 12: مهمة فهم منطق التفكير. نحن نحقق في وجود شبكة عصبية قائمة على الاهتمام من طرف إلى طرف لتمثيل أمرين مرشحين قريبين من المعجم. من ناحية ، نستخرج أجزائها المختلفة كنواقل اهتمام للحصول على تمثيلات مميزة. من ناحية أخرى ، نستخدم محيطهم (أي الادعاء ، السبب ، سياق النقاش) كمتجهات اهتمام أخرى للحصول على تمثيلات سياقية ، والتي تعمل بمثابة أدلة نهائية لتحديد الأمر الصحيح. يحقق نموذجنا دقة تصل إلى 60.4٪ ويحتل المرتبة الثالثة بين 22 نظامًا مشاركًا.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta nuestras presentaciones a la Tarea 12 de SemEval 2018: la tarea de comprensión del razonamiento del argumento. Investigamos una red neuronal integral basada en la atención para representar las dos órdenes de candidatos léxicamente cercanas. Por un lado, extraemos sus diferentes partes como vectores de atención para obtener representaciones distinguibles. Por otro lado, utilizamos su entorno (es decir, afirmación, razón, contexto de debate) como otros vectores de atención para obtener representaciones contextuales, que funcionan como pistas finales para seleccionar la orden correcta. Nuestro modelo logra una precisión del 60,4% y ocupa el tercer lugar entre los 22 sistemas participantes.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta nossas submissões para a Tarefa 12 do SemEval 2018: a Tarefa de Compreensão de Raciocínio de Argumentos. Investigamos uma rede neural baseada em atenção de ponta a ponta para representar as duas garantias candidatas lexicalmente próximas. Por um lado, extraímos suas diferentes partes como vetores de atenção para obter representações distinguíveis. Por outro lado, usamos seus arredores (ou seja, afirmação, razão, contexto de debate) como outros vetores de atenção para obter representações contextuais, que funcionam como pistas finais para selecionar a garantia correta. Nosso modelo atinge 60,4% de precisão e ocupa o 3º lugar entre 22 sistemas participantes.', 'fr': "Cet article présente nos soumissions pour SemEval 2018 Task 12\xa0: the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Nous étudions un réseau neuronal basé sur l'attention de bout en bout pour représenter les deux mandats candidats lexicalement proches. D'une part, nous extrayons leurs différentes parties en tant que vecteurs d'attention pour obtenir des représentations distinctives. D'autre part, nous utilisons leur environnement (c.-à-d. revendication, raison, contexte de débat) comme d'autres vecteurs d'attention pour obtenir des représentations contextuelles, qui fonctionnent comme des indices finaux pour sélectionner le bon mandat. Notre modèle atteint une précision de 60,4\xa0% et se classe au 3e rang parmi les 22 systèmes participants.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasoning理解タスクへの提出物を紹介します。私たちは、語彙的に近い2つの候補ワラントを表すために、エンドツーエンドの注意に基づくニューラルネットワークを調査します。一方で、区別可能な表現を得るために、注意ベクトルとしてそれらの異なる部分を抽出します。一方、私たちは、彼らの周囲（すなわち、主張、理性、議論コンテキスト）を別の注意ベクトルとして使用して、コンテキスト表現を取得します。これは、正しいワラントを選択するための最終的な手がかりとして機能します。当社のモデルは、60.4 ％の精度を実現し、22の参加システムの中で第3位です。', 'zh': '本文介于SemEval 2018 Task 12:Argument Reasoning Understandinging Task。 论一端到之神经网络,以示两词法之近权证。 一者,取其异以为向量,以得其分也。 其一,用其周围环境(,声明推理,辩上下文)以为意向量以得上下文,以为择正之终也。 模样成60.4%准确率,22参第三。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2018 टास्क 12: तर्क तर्क समझ कार्य के लिए हमारी प्रस्तुतियों को प्रस्तुत करता है। हम दो लेक्सिकल रूप से करीबी उम्मीदवार वारंट का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क की जांच करते हैं। एक तरफ, हम अलग-अलग प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करने के लिए ध्यान वैक्टर के रूप में उनके विभिन्न भागों को निकालते हैं। दूसरी ओर, हम प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करने के लिए एक और ध्यान वैक्टर के रूप में उनके चारों ओर (यानी, दावा, कारण, बहस संदर्भ) का उपयोग करते हैं, जो सही वारंट का चयन करने के लिए अंतिम सुराग के रूप में काम करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल 60.4% सटीकता प्राप्त करता है और 22 भाग लेने वाली प्रणालियों में तीसरे स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлены наши материалы для задачи 12 SemEval 2018: задача «Понимание аргументации». Мы исследуем сквозную нейронную сеть, основанную на внимании, чтобы представить два лексически близких ордера-кандидата. С одной стороны, мы извлекаем их различные части в качестве векторов внимания для получения различимых представлений. С другой стороны, мы используем их окружение (т.е. претензию, причину, контекст дебатов) в качестве еще одного вектора внимания, чтобы получить контекстные представления, которые работают в качестве окончательных подсказок, чтобы выбрать правильный ордер. Наша модель достигает 60,4% точности и занимает 3-е место среди 22 участвующих систем.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo ár n-aighneachtaí i láthair maidir le Tasc 12 SemEval 2018: an Tasc Tuisceana ar Réasúnaíocht Argóint. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar líonra néarúil aird-bhunaithe ceann go ceann chun an dá bharántas iarrthóra atá gar ó thaobh an fhoclóra a léiriú. Ar thaobh amháin, bainimid amach a gcodanna éagsúla mar veicteoirí aird chun léiriúcháin inaitheanta a fháil. Ar an láimh eile, úsáidimid a dtimpeallacht (i.e., éileamh, cúis, comhthéacs díospóireachta) mar veicteoirí aird eile chun léirithe comhthéacsúla a fháil, a oibríonn mar leideanna deiridh chun an barántas ceart a roghnú. Baineann ár múnla cruinneas 60.4% amach agus tá sé sa 3ú háit i measc 22 córas rannpháirteach.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო 2018 სამუშაო დავალება 12: აპგუმენტის მიზეზი კომპრეცენციის დავალება. ჩვენ შევსწავლობთ ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც საკუთარ დაბრუნებული კანდიდენტის დასაწყებლად. ერთი მხარედან, ჩვენ განსხვავებული ნაწილების განსხვავებული ნაწილების გამოყენებთ, როგორც დაახლოებით განსხვავებელი გამოყენებები. მეორე მხარეს, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ მათი გარშემო (მაგალითად, მიზეზი, დიბატის კონტექსტი) როგორც სხვა აღმოჩენების გვეკტექსტური გამოსახულებები, რომელიც მუშაობაც საკუთარი კო ჩვენი მოდელი 60,4% წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენება და მესამე წარმოდგენება 22 სტემისტემაში.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task című előadásainkat. Egy teljes figyelem alapú neurális hálózatot vizsgálunk, amely a két lexikailag közeli jelölt parancsot képviseli. Egyrészt figyelemvektorként vonjuk ki különböző részeiket, hogy megkülönböztethető reprezentációkat kapjunk. Másrészről a környezetüket (azaz állítás, ok, vita kontextus) használjuk, mint egy másik figyelem vektorként, hogy kontextuális reprezentációkat kapjunk, amelyek végső nyomként működnek a megfelelő parancs kiválasztásához. Modellünk 60,4%-os pontosságot ér el, és a 22 résztvevő rendszer közül a harmadik helyen áll.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει τις παρατηρήσεις μας στο έργο 12: το έργο κατανόησης επιχειρημάτων. Ερευνούμε ένα νευρικό δίκτυο που βασίζεται στην προσοχή για να αντιπροσωπεύει τα δύο λεξικά κοντινά εντάλματα υποψηφίων. Αφενός, εξάγουμε τα διαφορετικά μέρη τους ως φορείς προσοχής για να αποκτήσουμε διακριτές αναπαραστάσεις. Από την άλλη πλευρά, χρησιμοποιούμε το περιβάλλον τους (δηλ. ισχυρισμός, λογική, πλαίσιο συζήτησης) ως άλλο μέσο προσοχής για να πάρουμε περιβαλλοντικές αναπαραστάσεις, οι οποίες λειτουργούν ως τελικές ενδείξεις για να επιλέξουμε το σωστό ένταλμα. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 60,4% και κατατάσσεται 3η μεταξύ 22 συμμετεχόντων συστημάτων.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatomi mūsų pasiūlymai „SemEval 2018“ 12 uždaviniui „Argumento pagrindimo išsami užduotis“. Mes tiriame nuo karto iki galo dėmesiu pagrįstą nervinį tinklą, kuris atstovauja dviem leksikiškai artimoms kandidatų orderiams. Viena vertus, mes ištraukiame skirtingas jų dalis kaip dėmesio vektorius, kad gautume išskirtinius rodmenis. Kita vertus, mes naudojame jų aplinką (t. y. tvirtinimą, priežastį, diskusijų kontekstą) kaip kitus dėmesio veiksnius, kad gautume kontekstinius atstovavimus, kurie veikia kaip galutiniai įrodymai, kad pasirinktume teisingą orderį. Mūsų modelis pasiekia 60,4 proc. tikslumo ir yra trečias iš 22 dalyvaujančių sistemų.', 'mk': 'Овој документ ги претставува нашите поднесувања на SemEval 2018 задача 12: задачата за размислување на аргументите за разбирање. Истражуваме нервна мрежа базирана на внимание за да ги претставиме двете лексички блиски кандидатски налоги. Од една страна, ги извадуваме нивните различни делови како вектори на внимание за да добиеме различни претставувања. Од друга страна, ние ги користиме нивните околини (т.е., тврдење, причина, дебатирачки контекст) како други вектори на внимание за да добиеме контекстуални претставувања, кои работат како конечни траги за да го избереме вистинскиот налог. Нашиот модел постигнува точност од 60,4 отсто и се рангира на трето место меѓу 22 учествувачки системи.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta i nostri contributi a SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Investighiamo una rete neurale end-to-end basata sull'attenzione per rappresentare i due mandati candidati lessicamente vicini. Da un lato, estraiamo le loro diverse parti come vettori di attenzione per ottenere rappresentazioni distinguibili. D'altra parte, usiamo i loro surround (cioè, rivendicazione, ragione, contesto di discussione) come altri vettori di attenzione per ottenere rappresentazioni contestuali, che funzionano come indizi finali per selezionare il mandato corretto. Il nostro modello raggiunge una precisione del 60,4% e si colloca al terzo posto tra i 22 sistemi partecipanti.", 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta s-sottomissjonijiet tagħna lil SemEval 2018 Kompitu 12: il-Kompitu ta’ Komprensjoni ta’ Argument Reasoning. Aħna ninvestigaw netwerk newrali bbażat fuq l-attenzjoni minn tarf għal tarf biex jirrappreżenta ż-żewġ mandati kandidati magħluqa b’mod lexiku. Min-naħa l-waħda, neħħew il-partijiet differenti tagħhom bħala vetturi ta’ attenzjoni biex inkisbu rappreżentazzjonijiet distintivi. Min-naħa l-oħra, aħna nużaw l-ambjent tagħhom (jiġifieri, id-dikjarazzjoni, ir-raġuni, il-kuntest tad-dibattitu) bħala mezzi oħra ta’ attenzjoni biex jinkisbu rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwali, li jaħdmu bħala indikazzjonijiet final i biex jintgħażel il-mandat korrett. Il-mudell tagħna jikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 60.4% u jikklassifika t-tielet fost it-22 sistema parteċipanti.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің 2018 жылдың біртіндегі 12- тапсырмаға жіберімізді көрсетеді: аргументтің түсініктерін шешу тапсырмасы. Біз екі лексикалық жабылған кандидаттарды көрсету үшін аяқтау-аяқтау негізделген невралдық желіне зерттеудік. Бір жағында, біз олардың түрлі бөліктерін бір-бірінен бөліктерін бөліктеу векторлар ретінде түсіндіреміз. Біріншіден, біз олардың айналысуын (яғни, себептері, дискуссия контексті) басқа тәртіпсіздік бектері ретінде қолданамыз. Бұл соңғы тәртіпсіздік ретінде дұрыс жолдарды таңдау үшін соңғы Біздің үлгіміз 22 қатысушы жүйелердің 3-ші ретінде 60,4% дұрыстығын жеткізеді.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan penghantaran kita ke SemEval 2018 Tugas 12: Tugas Pemahaman Argumen. Kami menyelidiki rangkaian saraf berasaskan perhatian akhir-akhir untuk mewakili dua waran calon yang dekat secara lexik. Di satu sisi, kita mengekstrak bahagian-bahagian yang berbeza mereka sebagai vektor perhatian untuk mendapatkan perwakilan yang berbeza. On the other hand, we use their surrounds (i.e., claim, reason, debate context) as another attention vectors to get contextual representations, which work as final clues to select the correct warrant.  Model kita mencapai kepekatan 60.4% dan berturut-turut ke-3 diantara 22 sistem yang berpartisipasi.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12: ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് വീണ്ടും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കുന്ന പണിയായി കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അവസാനത്തേക്കുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കെറ്റിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ട്  ഒരു ഭാഗത്ത് നമ്മള്\u200d അവരുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ആക്കി പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നു. വ്യത് മറുപടിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അവരുടെ ചുറ്റുമുള്ള (അതായത്, കാരണം, വിവാദക്കാര്\u200d, വെക്സ്റ്റര്\u200d) വേറൊരു ശ്രദ്ധ വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ആയി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് ശരിയായ വാ Our model achieves 60.4% accuracy and ranks 3rd among 22 participating systems.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă prezentările noastre la SemEval 2018 Task 12: Argumentul Reactionarea Inteligenței Task. Investigăm o reţea neuronală bazată pe atenţie, care să reprezinte cele două mandate de candidat apropiate lexical. Pe de o parte, extragem diferitele părți ale acestora ca vectori de atenție pentru a obține reprezentări distinctive. Pe de altă parte, folosim împrejurimile lor (de exemplu, afirmația, motivul, contextul dezbaterii) ca un alt vector de atenție pentru a obține reprezentări contextuale, care funcționează ca indicii finale pentru a selecta mandatul corect. Modelul nostru atinge o precizie de 60,4% și se situează pe locul 3 printre cele 22 de sisteme participante.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2018 оны SemEval-ын ажил 12-д бидний хэлж байна: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Бид анхаарлын төгсгөлд анхаарлын төгсгөлд суурилсан мэдрэлийн сүлжээг судалж, хоёр сэтгэл хангамжийн удирдагчийг илэрхийлдэг. Нэг талаас бид өөр хэсгүүдийг анхаарлын векторууд болгон ялгаатай илэрхийллийг олж авах болно. Нөгөө талаас, бид тэдний тойрог (яг үнэлгээ, шалтгаан, зөрчилдөөн тухай) өөр анхаарлын векторуудыг өөр анхаарлын тухай хэрэглэдэг. Энэ нь зөв шалтгаан сонгохын тулд эцсийн дарааллаар ажилладаг. Бидний загвар нь 22 оролцох системийн хооронд зөв байдал 60.4%-д хүргэж байна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser våre tillegg til semiEval 2018 oppgåve 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Vi undersøker ein avslutt-til-slutt oppmerksomhetsbasert neuralnettverk for å representera dei to lukke kandidatordene. På ein side ekstraherer vi forskjellige deler sine som oppmerksvektorar for å få forskjellige representasjonar. On the other hand, we use their surroundings (i.e. claim, reason, debate context) as another attention vectors to get contextual representations, which works as final clues to select the correct warrant. Modellen vårt når 60,4% nøyaktig og reknar tredje mellom 22 deltakende systemer.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naše podatke na zadatak 12. iz semiEvala 2018: zadatak za osvajanje argumentacija. Istražujemo neuralnu mrežu na kraju do kraja pažnje kako bi predstavljali dve leksički bliske kandidatske naloge. S jedne strane, izvlačimo njihove različite delove kao vektore pažnje da bi dobili različite predstave. S druge strane, koristimo njihove okruženje (tj. tvrdnja, razlog, raspravni kontekst) kao druge vektore pažnje da bi dobili kontekstualne predstave, koje rade kao konačne tragove da bi odabrali pravu nalog. Naš model postiže tačnost 60,4% i redove 3 među 22 sistema sudjelovanja.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia nasze zgłoszenia do SemEval 2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Badamy kompleksową sieć neuronową opartą na uwadze, aby reprezentować dwa leksycznie bliskie nakazy kandydatów. Z jednej strony ekstraktujemy ich różne części jako wektory uwagi, aby uzyskać wyróżniające się reprezentacje. Z drugiej strony używamy ich otoczenia (tj. twierdzenia, rozumu, kontekstu debaty) jako kolejnych wektorów uwagi, aby uzyskać kontekstowe reprezentacje, które działają jako ostateczne wskazówki do wyboru prawidłowego nakazu. Nasz model osiąga dokładność 60,4% i zajmuje trzecie miejsce wśród 22 systemów uczestniczących.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar våra bidrag till SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Vi undersöker ett heltäckande uppmärksamhetsbaserat neuralt nätverk för att representera de två lexikalt nära kandidaterna. Å ena sidan extraherar vi deras olika delar som uppmärksamhetsvektorer för att få särskiljbara representationer. Å andra sidan använder vi deras omgivning (dvs. anspråk, resonemang, debattsammanhang) som andra uppmärksamhetsvektorer för att få kontextuella representationer, som fungerar som slutledtrådar för att välja rätt order. Vår modell uppnår 60,4% noggrannhet och rankas 3:a bland 22 deltagande system.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval 2018 பணிக்கு எங்கள் கட்டளைகளை வழங்குகிறது: ஆரம்ப ப முடிவு பணி நாம் ஒரு முடிவில் முடிவில் கவனம் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள புதிய வலைப்பின்னலை தேடுகிறோம் இரண்டு முன்னால் நெருக்கிய ஒரு பக்கத்தில், நாம் அவர்களுடைய வேறு பகுதிகளை கவனம் நெறிகளாக வெளியேற்றி வெளியேற்றுகிறோம், வேறுபட்ட பிரதி மற்றொரு பக்கத்தில், நாம் அவர்களை சுற்றி பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் (அதாவது, கேட்டு, காரணம், விவாதத்தின் மூலம்) மற்றொரு கவனத்திற்கான கவனத்தை பெறுகிறோம், அது சர நம்முடைய மாதிரி 60.4% சரியாக பெறுகிறது 22 பங்கீட்டு அமைப்புகளில் மூன்றாவது நிலையில் உள்ளது.', 'ur': 'This paper presents our submissions to SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. ہم نے ایک انتہائی انتہائی انتہائی توجه کی نائرول نیٹورک کی تحقیق کی کہ دو لکسیکی طریقے سے نزدیک کنڈیٹ واورنٹ کی نمایش کریں. ایک طرف، ہم ان کے مختلف قسموں کو سمجھنے والی ویکتوروں کے لئے اٹھا لیتے ہیں کہ ان کی مختلف قسموں کو تفصیل معلومات حاصل کریں۔ دوسری طرف، ہم ان کے اطراف (یعنی ادعا، دلیل، بحث متصل) کو دوسرے سمجھنے والی ویکتوروں کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں، جو سمجھنے والی وضع کو انتخاب کرنے کے لئے آخری نشانیوں کے طور پر کام کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری مدل 60.4% دقیقیت اور درجے 22 شرکت سیستموں میں تیسرے درجے پہنچ جاتے ہیں۔', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළ අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අධික අවස්ථාවක් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන කරන්න ලෙක් එක පැත්තෙන්, අපි ඔවුන්ගේ වෙනස් කොටස් වලින් අවධානය වෙක්ටර් වලින් අල්ලගන්නවා විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිනි අනිත් පැත්තෙන්, අපි ඔවුන්ගේ ආවරණය භාවිතා කරනවා (ඉතින්, හේතුව, කතා කරන්න සම්බන්ධයක්) අනිත් අවධානය වෙක්ටර් වලින්, සම්බන්ධ අපේ මොඩල් හරියට 60.4% සිද්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා සහ 3. පද්ධතිය 22 අතර.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa sameynta SemEval 2018 shaqo 12: Shaqada kaamilka heshiiska. Waxaynu baaraynaa shabakadda caqabadaha ee ugu dambaysta ah oo ku saleysan dhammaadka ugu dambeeya si aan u representno labada ogolaanshiyo ku dhow ee mushaarka. Isku jira, qeybahooda kala duwan ayaan u soo bixinnaa wadooyin dareemeyn ah si aan u helno noocyo kala duwan. Sida kale, waxaynu u isticmaalnaa hareerahooda (tusaale ahaan dacwad, sabab, debaar) si aan u helno qof kale oo loo soo jeedo, kaas oo u shaqeynaya tusaale ugu dambeeya in loo doorto ogolaanshaha saxda ah. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa 60.4% saxda, wuxuuna ka mid yahay saddexaad nidaamka qaybsasha 22.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval 2018 Vazifa 12: Argumentni qayta olish vazifasini beradi. Biz oxirgi paytda o'rganish tarmoqni o'rganamiz, ikkita leksik yopish vazifalarni represent qilish uchun. Bir bir tomonda, biz ularning turli qismlarini o'zgartirish vositalari sifatida chiqaramiz. Boshqa tomonda, biz ularning атрофидаги (воситаси, sabab, debate context) va boshqa paydo-attention vektorlarini ishlatamiz. Bu muammolar to ʻgʻri huquqlarni tanlash uchun oxirgi imkoniyatlarni ishlayapmiz. Our model achieves 60.4% accuracy and ranks 3rd among 22 participating systems.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này sẽ giới thiệu công việc của chúng ta cho SemEvol 208. Nhiệm vụ phức tạp về lý luận. Chúng tôi điều tra một mạng thần kinh dựa trên sự chú ý để đại diện cho hai đơn thuốc chữa cho ứng viên. Một mặt, chúng tôi trích xuất các bộ phận khác nhau như cỗ máy tập trung để đạt được các biểu tượng khác nhau. Mặt khác, chúng tôi sử dụng vùng xung quanh của họ (ví dụ, yêu cầu, lý do, ngữ cảnh tranh luận) như một cỗ máy quan tâm khác để có được các biểu hiện ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ, những manh mối cuối cùng để chọn đúng trát bắt. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đạt được độ chính xác và đứng thứ ba trong hệ thống mười hai.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer vores indlæg til SemEval 2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Vi undersøger et end-to-end opmærksomhedsbaseret neuralt netværk til at repræsentere de to leksikologisk tætte kandidater kendelser. På den ene side udtrækker vi deres forskellige dele som opmærksomhedsvektorer for at opnå skelnelige repræsentationer. På den anden side bruger vi deres omgivelser (dvs. påstand, grund, debat kontekst) som andre opmærksomhedsvektorer til at få kontekstuelle repræsentationer, som fungerer som endelige spor til at vælge den korrekte kendelse. Vores model opnår 60,4% nøjagtighed og rangerer 3. blandt 22 deltagende systemer.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя нашите предложения към Задача 12: Задачата за разбиране на аргументите. Разследваме невронна мрежа от край до край, базирана на внимание, за да представим двете лексически близки заповеди за кандидатстване. От една страна, извличаме различните им части като вектори на вниманието, за да получим отличими изображения. От друга страна, ние използваме техните обкръжения (т.е. претенция, причина, контекст на дебата) като друг вектор на вниманието, за да получим контекстуални представи, които работят като окончателни улики за избор на правилната заповед. Нашият модел постига 60.4% точност и се нарежда на трето място сред 22 участващи системи.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert onze inzendingen aan SemEval 2018 Task 12: de Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. We onderzoeken een end-to-end aandachtsgebonden neuraal netwerk om de twee lexicaal hechte kandidaat warrants weer te geven. Enerzijds extraheren we hun verschillende delen als aandachtsvectoren om onderscheidbare representaties te verkrijgen. Aan de andere kant gebruiken we hun surrounds (d.w.z. claim, rede, debat context) als andere aandachtsvectoren om contextuele representaties te krijgen, die werken als laatste aanwijzingen om de juiste warrant te selecteren. Ons model bereikt 60,4% nauwkeurigheid en staat op de derde plaats onder de 22 deelnemende systemen.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naše podatke na zadatak 12. iz polovice 2018. godine: zadatak za osvajanje argumenta. Istražujemo neuralnu mrežu na temelju pažnje na kraju do kraja kako bi predstavili dvije leksički bliske kandidatske naloge. S jedne strane, izvlačimo njihove različite dijelove kao vektore pažnje da bi dobili različite predstave. S druge strane, koristimo njihove okruženje (tj. tvrdnja, razlog, raspravni kontekst) kao druge pozorne vektore kako bi dobili kontekstualne predstave, koji djeluju kao konačni tragovi da bi odabrali pravu nalog. Naš model postiže tačnost 60,4% i redove 3 među 22 sustava sudjelovanja.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt unsere Beiträge zur SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task vor. Wir untersuchen ein Ende-zu-Ende aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes neuronales Netzwerk, um die beiden lexikalisch nahen Kandidatenwirrants darzustellen. Zum einen extrahieren wir ihre verschiedenen Teile als Aufmerksamkeitsvektoren, um unterscheidbare Darstellungen zu erhalten. Auf der anderen Seite verwenden wir ihre Surrounds (d.h. Behauptung, Vernunft, Debattenkontext) als weitere Aufmerksamkeitsvektoren, um kontextuelle Darstellungen zu erhalten, die als endgültige Hinweise zur Auswahl des richtigen Warrants dienen. Unser Modell erreicht 60,4% Genauigkeit und belegt Platz drei unter 22 teilnehmenden Systemen.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2018 퀘스트 12: 논증 추리 이해 퀘스트에 대한 우리의 의견을 소개한다.우리는 두 어휘가 비슷한 후보 주주권 취득증을 나타내는 단말기부터 단말기까지의 신경 네트워크를 연구했다.한편, 우리는 그것들의 서로 다른 부분을 주의 벡터로 추출하여 구분할 수 있는 표징을 얻는다.다른 한편, 우리는 그들의 포위망(즉 주장, 이유, 변론 어경)을 다른 주의 벡터로 삼아 어경 표징을 얻어 정확한 증거를 선택하는 최종 단서로 삼는다.우리의 모델은 60.4%의 정확도에 이르렀으며 22개 참여 시스템 중 3위에 올랐다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linatoa maoni yetu kwa SemEval 2018 Kazi 12: Kazi ya Kusoma Msimu. Tunafanya uchunguzi wa mtandao wa neura wa mwisho wa kusikiliza ili kuwakilisha vituo viwili vya karibu vya mgombea nchini lexico. Kwa upande mmoja, tunatoa sehemu zao tofauti kama vectors of attention to obtain representations tofauti. On the other hand, we use their surrounds (i.e., claim, reason, debate context) as another attention vectors to get contextual representations, which work as final clues to select the correct warrant.  Mfano wetu unapata asilimia 60.4 ya sahihi na unaratibu daraja tatu kati ya mifumo 22 ya ushiriki.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تحویل\u200cهای ما را به تابع ۱۲۲ سال ۲۰۱۸ نشان می\u200cدهد: واژه\u200cهای دلایل تحویل. ما یک شبکه عصبی به پایان و پایان توجه را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم تا دو دستور نامزدی نزدیک به زبان نشان دهیم. از یک طرف، ما بخش\u200cهای مختلف آنها را به عنوان ویکتورهای توجه برای گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای متفاوتی خارج می\u200cکنیم. از طرف دیگر، ما از محیط آنها استفاده می\u200cکنیم (یعنی ادعا، دلیل، محیط بحث) به عنوان ویکتورهای دیگر توجه برای انتخاب نمایش\u200cهای موضوع، که به عنوان نشانه\u200cهای نهایی برای انتخاب حکم درست کار می\u200cکنند. مدل ما دقيقات 60.4 درصد و درجه 3 در بين 22 سيستم شرکت رسيده است.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperlihatkan pengiriman kita ke SemEval 2018 Tugas 12: Argumen Reasoning Comprehension Task. Kami menyelidiki jaringan saraf berbasis perhatian dari akhir ke akhir untuk mewakili dua surat perintah kandidat yang dekat secara lexik. On the one hand, we extract their different parts as attention vectors to obtain distinguishable representations.  Di sisi lain, kami menggunakan lingkungan mereka (i.e., klaim, alasan, konteks debat) sebagai vektor perhatian lain untuk mendapatkan representation kontekstual, yang bekerja sebagai petunjuk akhir untuk memilih surat perintah yang benar. Model kita mencapai akurasi 60,4% dan tingkat ketiga diantara 22 sistem yang berpartisipasi.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz biziň göndermelerimizi SemEval 2018 Görevi 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task'a gösteriyor. Biz bu ikisini leksiýa ýakyn watandaryny temsil etmek üçin iň üstüne görýän näral şebekesini inceleýäris. Bir yandan, farklı parçalarını farklı ifadeleri almak için vektörler olarak çıkarıyoruz. On the other hand, we use their surroundings (i.e. claim, reason context) as another attention vectors to get contextual representations, which works as final clues to select the correct warrant. Biziň nusgymyz 60.4% dogry we 22-nji gabat sistemalaryň arasynda 3-nji derejede ýetip barýar.", 'af': "Hierdie papier stel ons onderwerpe aan SemEval 2018 Opdrag 12: die Argument Oorsaak Kompleksie Opdrag. Ons ondersoek 'n einde-tot-einde aandag-gebaseerde neuralnetwerk om die twee leksies toe kandidate waardes te verteenwoordig. Op die een hand trek ons hul verskillende dele as aandagvektore uit om verskillende voorstellings te kry. Op die ander kant gebruik ons hulle omring (i.e. aandruk, rede, debattkonteks) as 'n ander aandagsvectors om contextual voorstellings te kry, wat werk as finale kloue om die korrekte waardeel te kies. Ons model bereik 60,4% waarskynlik en rank 3 onder 22 deelnadende stelsels.", 'sq': 'This paper presents our submissions to SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task.  Ne hetojmë një rrjet nervor të bazuar në vëmendje nga fundi në fund për të përfaqësuar dy mandatet e kandidatit lexikisht të ngushtë. On the one hand, we extract their different parts as attention vectors to obtain distinguishable representations.  Nga ana tjetër, ne përdorim rrethinat e tyre (pra, pretendim, arsye, kontekst debati) si një vektor tjetër vëmendjeje për të marrë përfaqësime kontekstuale, të cilat punojnë si udhëzime përfundimtare për të zgjedhur mandatin e saktë. Modeli ynë arrin 60.4% saktësi dhe renditet i treti midis 22 sistemeve pjesëmarrës.', 'am': 'This paper presents our submissions to SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task.  የኋለኛውን የኒውራዊ መረብ እናሳውቃለን የሌክሲካዊ ተቃዋሚዎቹን ለመቆጣጠር እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በአንድ ወገን ልዩ ልዩ መልዕክቶችን ለማግኘት የጥያቄ መንገድ እናወጣለን፡፡ በሌላው ክፍል፣ በዙሪያቸው (አካባቢ፣ ምክር፣ ውይይት፣ ውይይት) እንደ ሌላ የጥያቄ አካባቢዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን 60.4 በመቶ እርግጠኛ እና በ22 ተካያፊዎች ስርዓቶች መካከል ሦስተኛ ደረጃዎች ይደረጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է մեր ներկայացումները 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ 2018" 12-ի հանձնարարությանը\' բանավեճ պատճառելու ընկալումների հանձնարարությանը: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք վերջ-վերջ ուշադրության հիմնված նյարդային ցանց, որպեսզի ներկայացնենք երկու լեքսիկապես մոտ թեկնածու պատվիրանները: Մի կողմից, մենք հանում ենք նրանց տարբեր մասերը որպես ուշադրության վեկտորներ, որպեսզի ստանանք տարբերակելի ներկայացումներ: Մյուս կողմից, մենք օգտագործում ենք նրանց շրջապատը (այսինքն, պնդում, պատճառ, քննարկման կոնտեքստը) որպես այլ ուշադրության վեկտոր, որպեսզի ստանանք կոնտեքստային ներկայացումներ, որոնք աշխատում են որպես վերջնական հնարավորություններ ճիշտ Մեր մոդելը հասնում է 60.4 տոկոսի ճշգրտության և երրորդ դասակարգում է 22 մասնակցում համակարգերի միջև:', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task'i təbliğ edir. Biz bu ikisini leksi olaraq yaxınlaşdırmaq üçün sona-sona təsirli nöral ağı təşkil edirik. Bir tərəfdən, müxtəlif parçalarını təsirli göstəricilər almaq üçün dikkat vektori kimi çıxardırıq. Digər tərəfindən, onların ətrafını (həqiqətən də, səbəb, mübahisə məlumatlarını) müxtəlif göstəricilər almaq üçün başqa bir məlumat vektörü kimi istifadə edirik. Bu, doğru warrant ı seçmək üçün son iplər kimi çalışır. Modelimiz 22 iştirak sistemlərin arasında 60,4% ədaləti və 3. dərəcəsi yetirir.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজ ১২-এর প্রতি আমাদের উপস্থাপন করেছে: আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরুদ্ধারের কাজ। আমরা শেষ পর্যন্ত মনোযোগের ভিত্তিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক অনুসন্ধান করি যাতে দুই লেক্সিক্সিকালের কাছাকাছি প্রার্থী  একদিকে আমরা তাদের বিভিন্ন অংশ বের করে আকর্ষণীয় ভেক্টর হিসেবে বের করে আনি বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য। অন্যদিকে, আমরা তাদের চারপাশে ব্যবহার করি (যেমন দাবি করি, কারণ, বিতর্কের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য) আরেকটি মনোযোগ হিসেবে ব্যবহার করি, যা সঠিক ওয়ারেন্ট নির্ Our model achieves 60.4% accuracy and ranks 3rd among 22 participating systems.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naše podatke na zadatak 12. iz semiEvala 2018: zadatak za osvajanje argumenta. Istražujemo neuralnu mrežu na osnovu pažnje na kraju do kraja kako bi predstavili dva leksički zatvorena nalog za kandidate. S jedne strane, izvlačimo njihove različite dijelove kao vektore pažnje da bi dobili različite predstave. S druge strane, koristimo njihove okruženje (tj. tvrdnja, razlog, raspravni kontekst) kao druge vektore pažnje da bi dobili kontekstualne predstave, koje rade kao konačne tragove da bi odabrali pravu nalog. Naš model postiže tačnost 60,4% i redove 3 među 22 sustavima sudjelovanja.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje naše příspěvky k SemEval 2018 Task 12: argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Vyšetřujeme komplexní neuronovou síť založenou na pozornosti, která reprezentuje dva lexicky blízké kandidáty. Na jedné straně extrahujeme jejich různé části jako vektory pozornosti, abychom získali rozlišitelné reprezentace. Na druhou stranu používáme jejich prostředí (tj. tvrzení, rozum, kontext debaty) jako další vektory pozornosti k získání kontextových reprezentací, které fungují jako konečné vodítko pro výběr správného příkazu. Náš model dosahuje 60,4% přesnosti a má třetí místo mezi 22 zúčastněnými systémy.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis esitatakse meie ettepanekud SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasong Comprehension Task. Me uurime lõpp-lõpuni tähelepanu põhinevat närvivõrku, et esindada kahte leksikaalselt lähedast kandidaadi orderit. Ühest küljest ekstraheerime nende erinevad osad tähelepanu vektoritena, et saada eristatavaid esitusi. Teisest küljest kasutame nende ümbrust (st väite, põhjuse, debati konteksti) kui teist tähelepanu vektorit, et saada kontekstilisi esitusi, mis toimivad lõplike vihjetena õige orderi valimiseks. Meie mudel saavutab 60,4% täpsuse ja on 22 osaleva süsteemi seas kolmandal kohal.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta les nostres presentacions a SemEval 2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Investiguem una xarxa neuronal basada en l'atenció de cap a cap per representar les dues mandates de candidats llexicament estretes. D'un banda, extreuem les seves diferents parts com vectors d'atenció per obtenir representacions distingibles. On the other hand, we use their surrounds (i.e., claim, reason, debate context) as another attention vectors to get contextual representations, which work as final clues to select the correct warrant.  El nostre model obté la precisió del 60,4% i es classe en tercer lloc entre 22 sistemes participants.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään artikkelimme SemEval 2018 Task 12: the Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Tutkimme tarkkaavaisuuteen perustuvaa neuroverkkoa, joka edustaa kahta sanastollisesti läheistä pidätysmääräystä. Toisaalta poimimme niiden eri osat huomiovektoriksi saadaksemme erottuvia esityksiä. Toisaalta käytämme heidän ympäristöjään (väite, järki, keskustelun konteksti) toisena huomion vektorina saadaksemme kontekstuaalisia esityksiä, jotka toimivat lopullisina vihjeinä oikean etsintäluvan valitsemiseksi. Mallimme saavuttaa 60,4% tarkkuuden ja sijoittuu kolmanneksi 22 järjestelmään osallistuvan järjestelmän joukossa.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה את ההצגות שלנו למשימה "SemEval 2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task". אנו חוקרים רשת עצבית מבוססת על תשומת לב סוף סוף כדי לייצג את שני צוות המועמדים הקרובים ללקסיקה. מצד אחד, אנו מוציאים את החלקים השונים שלהם כווקטורי תשומת לב כדי להשיג מייצגים מבודדים. מצד שני, אנו משתמשים בסביבה שלהם (כלומר, טענה, סיבה, קשר דיון) כווקטורי תשומת לב נוספים כדי לקבל מייצגים קונטקסטיים, שעובדים כרמזים סופיים כדי לבחור את הצו הנכון. הדוגמא שלנו משיגה מדויקה של 60.4% והורג השלישי בין 22 מערכות משתתפות.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da ziman da mu zuwa aikin Semeval 2018: Kayan Argument na Shirin da Akwai Comprehension. Tuna ƙidãya a bakin-ƙari zuwa-ƙari na aikin neural dõmin mu nuna wa ma'anar-kandida biyu leksikally makusanta. Kuma da guda sai Muke fitar da rabunansu dabam-daban kamar shiryoyi masu saurãre dõmin su sami mutane da dabam-daban. On the other hand, we use their surrounds (i.e., claim, reason, debate context) as another attention vectors to get contextual representations, which work as final clues to select the correct warrant.  Tuddanmu yana sãmu 60.4% tabbatacce kuma yana da darajõji uku daga cikin mutane na 22.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja naše prispevke k nalogi 12 SemEval 2018: nalogi razumevanja argumentov. Raziskovali smo nevronsko omrežje, ki temelji na pozornosti od konca do konca, ki predstavlja dva leksikalno blizu naloga. Po eni strani izvlečemo njihove različne dele kot vektorje pozornosti, da bi dobili različne reprezentacije. Po drugi strani pa uporabljamo njihove okolice (tj. trditev, razlog, kontekst debate) kot še en vektor pozornosti, da dobimo kontekstualne predstavitve, ki delujejo kot končni namigi za izbiro pravega naloga. Naš model dosega 60,4% natančnost in se uvršča na 3. mesto med 22 sodelujočimi sistemi.', 'jv': 'Ngetongkat iki soko nggawe rerungane soko seminval 2008 task 12: the argument RESSOWning Comprerension task. Awak dhéwé yatêp hukum sing beraksi tambah-alat sing basa gambar nggambar kelas kuwi wis dipun. MTR Nanging second hand, we use wrappers model sing wis rampun 60.4% sing klêrung lan katêpakan tanggal 3 sampeyan 22 sampeyan sing bisa nguasai.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་SemEval 2018 ལས་ཀ་བཤད་པ་༡༢：སྒྲུབ་གྲངས་རྗེས་མཁན་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We investigate an end-to-end attention-based neural network to represent the two lexically close candidates warrants. ཕྱོགས་གཅིག་ནས་ང་ཚོས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ཆ་ཤས་མ་འདྲ་བ་དེ་ཐད་ནས་དབྱིན་གྱི་རྟོགས་པ་ཞིག་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད། ཕྱོགས་གཞན་ཞིག་ནས་(དཔེར་ན། ང་ཚོས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐའ་འཁོར་གཞུང་གི་ཆ་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་)བྱེད་པའི་མཐོང་སྣང་གཞན་ཞིག་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་ཤར་ཐུབ་པའི་བྱ་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་གཟུགས་རིས་བདེན་པར་60.4% དང་མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་སྤྱོད་ཆའི་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་༣།'}
{'en': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'ar': 'NLITrans في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: نقل المعرفة الدلالية لفهم الحجج', 'es': 'NLItrans en SemEval-2018 Tarea 12: Transferencia de conocimiento semántico para la comprensión de argumentos', 'pt': 'NLITrans na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: Transferência de Conhecimento Semântico para Compreensão de Argumentos', 'fr': "NLITrans au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 12\xa0: Transfert de connaissances sémantiques pour la compréhension d'arguments", 'ja': 'NLITrans at SemEval -2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Compceptsion', 'zh': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 务 12:为参数传语义', 'ru': 'NLITrans на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Передача семантических знаний для понимания аргументов', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 12 पर NLITrans: तर्क समझ के लिए शब्दार्थ ज्ञान का हस्तांतरण', 'ga': 'NLITrans ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: Aistriú Eolais Shéimeantach chun Argóint a Thuiscint', 'el': 'Εργασία 12: Μεταφορά Σημαντικής Γνώσης για Κατανόηση των επιχειρημάτων', 'it': 'NLITrans al SemEval-2018 Task 12: Trasferimento di conoscenze semantiche per la comprensione degli argomenti', 'ka': 'NLITrans SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 12: Semantic Knowledge Transfer for Argument Comprehension', 'hu': 'NLITrans a SemEval-2018 12. feladat: Szemantikus tudás átadása az érveléshez', 'kk': 'NLITrans at semiEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'lt': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12: ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് പുതുക്കുവാനുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് അറിവ് മാറ്റുക', 'mk': 'NLITrans на SemEval-2018 задача 12: Пренесување семантичко знаење за разбирање на аргументите', 'ms': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'mt': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'no': 'NLITrans på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 12: Overføring av semiantisk kjennende for argumentkomprehensing', 'sr': 'NLITrans na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: Prebacivanje semantičkih znanja za kompresiju argumenta', 'mn': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka SemEval-2018', 'ro': 'NLITrans la SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer de cunoștințe semantice pentru înțelegerea argumentelor', 'pl': 'NLITrans w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Transfer wiedzy semantycznej dla zrozumienia argumentów', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் NLITrans: Argument Completion for Semantic Knowledge Transfer of Semantic Knowledge', 'ur': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'si': 'NLITrans at semeval-2018 Job 12: Transfer of semantic KnowKnowKnowKnowKnowKnow for', 'sv': 'NLITrans på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: Överföring av semantisk kunskap för argumentförståelse', 'uz': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'vi': 'NLITrans at SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 12: truyền thuộc dạng trung học cho sự phức tạp về Argument', 'da': 'NLITrans på SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Overførsel af semantisk viden til argumentforståelse', 'nl': 'NLITrans bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Transfer van semantische kennis voor argumentbegrip', 'hr': 'NLITrans na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: Prebacivanje semantičkih znanja za komprehenziju argumenta', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Прехвърляне на семантично знание за разбиране на аргументите', 'de': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 12: Transfer von semantischem Wissen zum Argumentverständnis', 'id': 'NLITrans di SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'fa': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'sw': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'ko': 'NLITrans가SemEval-18 임무12: 논점 이해를 위한 의미 이동 지식', 'tr': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'af': 'NLITrans by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 12: Oordrag van Semantiese kennis vir Argument', 'sq': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'am': 'Trans at SemEval-2018 ስራ 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Completion', 'hy': 'ՆԼԻԹԱնսը 2018-ի "Սեմենտիկ գիտելիքների փոխանցումը բանավեճի ընկալումը"', 'az': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১২: আর্গামেন্ট সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য সেম্যান্টিক জ্ঞান পরিবর্তন', 'ca': 'NLITrans a SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'cs': 'NLITrans na SemEval-2018 Úkol 12: Transfer sémantických znalostí pro pochopení argumentů', 'bs': 'NLITrans na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: Prebacivanje semantičkih znanja za komprehenziju argumenta', 'et': 'NLItrans SemEval-2018 ülesandel 12: Semantiliste teadmiste edasiandmine argumentide mõistmiseks', 'fi': 'NLItrans SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: Semanttisen tiedon siirto argumenttien ymmärtämiseen', 'jv': 'NLITra at semiinval-2008 task 12: transfer of semanti knowknowness for argument Compréncion', 'ha': 'Trans at SemEl-2018 Tafiyar 12: Transform of Semantic Cilmi for Comprehension', 'sk': 'NLItrans na SemEval-2018 naloga 12: Prenos semantičnega znanja za razumevanje argumentov', 'he': 'NLITrans ב SemEval-2018 משימה 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension', 'bo': 'NLITrans at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transfer of Semantic Knowledge for Argument Comprehension'}
{'en': 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task is a difficult challenge requiring significant language understanding and complex reasoning over world knowledge. We focus on transfer of a sentence encoder to bootstrap more complicated architectures given the small size of the dataset. Our best model uses a pre-trained BiLSTM to encode input sentences, learns task-specific features for the argument and warrants, then performs independent argument-warrant matching. This model achieves mean test set accuracy of 61.31 %. Encoder transfer yields a significant gain to our best model over random initialization. Sharing parameters for independent warrant evaluation provides regularization and effectively doubles the size of the dataset. We demonstrate that regularization comes from ignoring statistical correlations between warrant positions. We also report an experiment with our best model that only matches warrants to reasons, ignoring claims. Performance is still competitive, suggesting that our model is not necessarily learning the intended task.', 'ar': 'تعتبر مهمة فهم استدلال الحجج تحديًا صعبًا يتطلب فهمًا لغويًا كبيرًا وتفكيرًا معقدًا على معرفة العالم. نحن نركز على نقل مشفر الجملة لتمهيد البنى الأكثر تعقيدًا نظرًا لصغر حجم مجموعة البيانات. يستخدم أفضل نموذج لدينا BiLSTM المدربة مسبقًا لتشفير جمل الإدخال ، وتعلم الميزات الخاصة بالمهمة للحجة والضمانات ، ثم إجراء مطابقة مستقلة بين الحجج والضمانات. هذا النموذج يحقق متوسط دقة مجموعة الاختبار بنسبة 61.31٪. ينتج عن نقل التشفير مكاسب كبيرة لأفضل نموذج لدينا على التهيئة العشوائية. توفر معلمات المشاركة لتقييم أمر مستقل تنظيمًا وتضاعف حجم مجموعة البيانات بشكل فعال. نظهر أن التنظيم يأتي من تجاهل الارتباطات الإحصائية بين مواقف الضمان. نقوم أيضًا بالإبلاغ عن تجربة بأفضل نموذج لدينا تتطابق فقط مع الضمانات مع الأسباب ، وتجاهل الادعاءات. لا يزال الأداء تنافسيًا ، مما يشير إلى أن نموذجنا لا يتعلم بالضرورة المهمة المقصودة.', 'es': 'La tarea de comprensión del razonamiento argumental es un desafío difícil que requiere una comprensión significativa del idioma y un razonamiento complejo sobre el conocimiento mundial. Nos centramos en la transferencia de un codificador de oraciones para arrancar arquitecturas más complicadas dado el pequeño tamaño del conjunto de datos. Nuestro mejor modelo utiliza un BilsTM previamente entrenado para codificar oraciones de entrada, aprende las características específicas de la tarea para el argumento y las garantías, y luego realiza una comparación independiente entre argumentos y garantías. Este modelo logra una precisión media del conjunto de pruebas del 61,31%. La transferencia del codificador produce una ganancia significativa para nuestro mejor modelo en comparación con la inicialización aleatoria. Compartir parámetros para la evaluación independiente de garantías proporciona regularización y duplica efectivamente el tamaño del conjunto de datos. Demostramos que la regularización proviene de ignorar las correlaciones estadísticas entre las posiciones de los warrants. También informamos de un experimento con nuestro mejor modelo que solo hace coincidir las garantías con las razones, ignorando las afirmaciones. El rendimiento sigue siendo competitivo, lo que sugiere que nuestro modelo no necesariamente está aprendiendo la tarea deseada.', 'fr': "La tâche de compréhension du raisonnement des arguments est un défi difficile qui nécessite une compréhension linguistique importante et un raisonnement complexe par rapport à la connaissance du monde. Nous nous concentrons sur le transfert d'un encodeur de phrase pour amorcer des architectures plus complexes compte tenu de la petite taille de l'ensemble de données. Notre meilleur modèle utilise un BilsTM pré-entraîné pour coder les phrases d'entrée, apprend les fonctionnalités spécifiques à la tâche pour l'argument et les bons de souscription, puis effectue une correspondance argument-mandat indépendante. Ce modèle atteint une précision moyenne d'ensemble de tests de 61,31\xa0%. Le transfert de l'encodeur apporte un gain significatif à notre meilleur modèle par rapport à l'initialisation aléatoire. Le partage de paramètres pour une évaluation indépendante des mandats permet de régulariser et de doubler efficacement la taille de l'ensemble de données. Nous démontrons que la régularisation vient de l'ignorance des corrélations statistiques entre les positions de mandats. Nous rapportons également une expérience avec notre meilleur modèle qui ne fait correspondre que les justifications aux raisons, en ignorant les réclamations. La performance est toujours compétitive, ce qui suggère que notre modèle n'apprend pas nécessairement la tâche prévue.", 'pt': 'A Tarefa de Compreensão do Raciocínio Argumentativo é um desafio difícil que requer compreensão significativa da linguagem e raciocínio complexo sobre o conhecimento do mundo. Nós nos concentramos na transferência de um codificador de sentença para arquiteturas mais complicadas de bootstrap, devido ao pequeno tamanho do conjunto de dados. Nosso melhor modelo usa um BiLSTM pré-treinado para codificar sentenças de entrada, aprende recursos específicos da tarefa para o argumento e as garantias e, em seguida, executa a correspondência de garantia de argumento independente. Este modelo atinge a precisão média do conjunto de teste de 61,31%. A transferência do codificador gera um ganho significativo para nosso melhor modelo em relação à inicialização aleatória. O compartilhamento de parâmetros para avaliação de garantia independente fornece regularização e duplica efetivamente o tamanho do conjunto de dados. Demonstramos que a regularização vem de ignorar as correlações estatísticas entre as posições de garantia. Também relatamos um experimento com nosso melhor modelo que corresponde apenas às garantias aos motivos, ignorando as alegações. O desempenho ainda é competitivo, sugerindo que nosso modelo não está necessariamente aprendendo a tarefa pretendida.', 'ja': '論証推論理解タスクは、世界の知識よりも重要な言語理解と複雑な推論を必要とする困難な課題です。 データセットのサイズが小さいため、より複雑なアーキテクチャをブートストラップするための文エンコーダの転送に焦点を当てています。 当社のベストモデルは、事前にトレーニングされたBiLSTMを使用して入力文をエンコードし、引数とワラントのタスク固有の機能を学習し、独立した引数とワラントのマッチングを実行します。 このモデルでは、平均試験器の精度が61.31 ％に達します。 エンコーダ転送は、ランダムな初期化よりも当社の最良のモデルに大きな利得をもたらします。 独立したワラント評価のためのパラメータを共有することで、正規化が可能になり、データセットのサイズが効果的に2倍になります。 正規化は、ワラントポジション間の統計的相関を無視することから生じることを実証しています。 また、クレームを無視して、ワラントと理由のみを一致させるベストモデルの実験も報告しています。 パフォーマンスはまだ競争力があり、私たちのモデルが必ずしも意図されたタスクを学習しているとは限らないことを示唆しています。', 'zh': '论理解者,一也,多言解杂,非世知也。 鉴数据集之小尺寸,专注于将句编码器移于导引更杂之架构。 先教者 BiLSTM 编码句,学参数保特定,然后行独参数-。 其均试集精度为61.31%。 编码器传输因随机初始化为我最著。 共享参数以立权证评估以正则化,倍其大小。 吾证正则化出于忽权证仓位之间计相关性。 报我以至实验,实验保其故,忽于声明。 性犹有竞争力,未必学期也。', 'hi': 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task एक कठिन चुनौती है जिसके लिए विश्व ज्ञान पर महत्वपूर्ण भाषा समझ और जटिल तर्क की आवश्यकता होती है। हम डेटासेट के छोटे आकार को देखते हुए बूटस्ट्रैप और अधिक जटिल आर्किटेक्चर को बूटस्ट्रैप करने के लिए एक वाक्य एन्कोडर के हस्तांतरण पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हमारा सबसे अच्छा मॉडल इनपुट वाक्यों को एन्कोड करने के लिए एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित BiLSTM का उपयोग करता है, तर्क और वारंट के लिए कार्य-विशिष्ट सुविधाओं को सीखता है, फिर स्वतंत्र तर्क-वारंट मिलान करता है। यह मॉडल 61.31% की औसत परीक्षण सेट सटीकता प्राप्त करता है। एन्कोडर स्थानांतरण यादृच्छिक प्रारंभिककरण पर हमारे सबसे अच्छे मॉडल के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण लाभ उत्पन्न करता है। स्वतंत्र वारंट मूल्यांकन के लिए पैरामीटर साझा करना नियमितीकरण प्रदान करता है और डेटासेट के आकार को प्रभावी ढंग से दोगुना कर देता है। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि नियमितीकरण वारंट पदों के बीच सांख्यिकीय सहसंबंधों को अनदेखा करने से आता है। हम अपने सबसे अच्छे मॉडल के साथ एक प्रयोग की भी रिपोर्ट करते हैं जो केवल कारणों से वारंट से मेल खाता है, दावों की अनदेखी करता है। प्रदर्शन अभी भी प्रतिस्पर्धी है, यह सुझाव देते हुए कि हमारा मॉडल आवश्यक रूप से इच्छित कार्य नहीं सीख रहा है।', 'ru': 'Задача «Понимание аргументации» - трудная задача, требующая значительного понимания языка и сложных рассуждений над мировыми знаниями. Мы фокусируемся на переносе кодера предложений на загрузку более сложных архитектур, учитывая небольшой размер набора данных. Наша лучшая модель использует предварительно обученный BiLSTM для кодирования входных предложений, изучает особенности задачи для аргумента и ордера, а затем выполняет независимое сопоставление аргумента с ордером. Эта модель обеспечивает среднюю точность испытаний 61,31%. Передача кодового датчика дает значительное преимущество нашей лучшей модели над случайной инициализацией. Совместное использование параметров для независимой оценки ордера обеспечивает регуляризацию и эффективно удваивает размер набора данных. Мы демонстрируем, что регуляризация происходит в результате игнорирования статистических корреляций между позициями ордера. Мы также сообщаем об эксперименте с нашей лучшей моделью, которая только соответствует основаниям, игнорируя претензии. Производительность все еще конкурентоспособна, что предполагает, что наша модель не обязательно изучает предполагаемую задачу.', 'ga': 'Is dúshlán deacair é an Tasc Tuisceana um Réasúnú Argóine a éilíonn tuiscint shuntasach teanga agus réasúnaíocht chasta ar eolas an domhain. Dírímid ar ionchódóir abairte a aistriú chuig ailtireachtaí níos casta i bhfianaise mhéid an tacair sonraí. Úsáideann ár múnla is fearr BiLSTM réamh-oilte chun abairtí ionchuir a ionchódú, foghlaimíonn sé gnéithe tasc-shonracha don argóint agus barántais, ansin déanann sé meaitseáil neamhspleách argóint-barántas. Baineann an tsamhail seo amach cruinneas tacair tástála meánach 61.31%. Tá gnóthachan suntasach ag baint le haistriú ionchódóra ar ár múnla is fearr thar thúsú randamach. Soláthraíonn roinnt paraiméadair le haghaidh meastóireachta barántas neamhspleách rialtacht agus déanann sé méid an tacar sonraí a dhúbailt go héifeachtach. Léirímid go dtagann rialáil as neamhaird a dhéanamh ar chomhghaolta staitistiúla idir seasaimh barántais. Tuairiscímid freisin ar thurgnamh lenár múnla is fearr nach dtagann ach le barántais le cúiseanna, gan aird a thabhairt ar éilimh. Tá an fheidhmíocht fós iomaíoch, rud a thugann le tuiscint nach gá go bhfoghlaimíonn ár múnla an tasc atá beartaithe.', 'hu': 'Az Argument Reasing Comprehension feladat nehéz kihívás, amely jelentős nyelvmegértést és komplex érvelést igényel a világ ismeretében. Egy mondatkódoló átvitelére összpontosítunk a bonyolultabb architektúrákra, tekintettel az adathalmaz kis méretére. A legjobb modellünk egy előre képzett BiLSTM-et használ a beviteli mondatok kódolására, megtanulja a feladatspecifikus funkciókat az argumentumhoz és a garanciákhoz, majd független argumentum-parancs egyeztetést hajt végre. Ez a modell 61,31%-os átlagos vizsgálati pontosságot ér el. A kódolóátvitel jelentős nyereséget eredményez a legjobb modellünknek a véletlenszerű inicializáció felett. A független parancs értékeléséhez szükséges paraméterek megosztása biztosítja a szabályozást és hatékonyan megduplázza az adatkészlet méretét. Bemutatjuk, hogy a szabályozás abból ered, hogy figyelmen kívül hagyjuk a parancsnoki pozíciók statisztikai összefüggéseit. Jelentünk egy kísérletet is a legjobb modellünkkel, amely csak indokokkal egyezteti a parancsokat, figyelmen kívül hagyva a követeléseket. A teljesítmény még mindig versenyképes, ami arra utal, hogy modellünk nem feltétlenül tanul meg a tervezett feladatot.', 'kk': 'Аргументтің түсініктерін түсіндіру тапсырмасы - әлемдік білім бойынша маңызды тілдерді түсіндіру және комплексті түсініктерді талап ететін мәселе. Біз мәлімет кодерінің көп өлшемін берілген архитектураларды жүктеу үшін көмектесеміз. Біздің ең жақсы моделіміз аргументті және аргументтің аргументтің аргументтері үшін алдын- ала оқылған BiLSTM символдарын кодтау үшін қолданады. Содан кейін тәуелсіз аргументтің аргументтің аргумент Бұл үлгі 61, 31% деген тексеру дұрыстығын жеткізеді. Кодер аударуы кездейсоқ инициализациялау үшін ең жақсы үлгімізге маңызды жеткізеді. Тәуелсіз warrant бағалау параметрлерінің ортақтастыру параметрлері үлгілеу және деректер жиының өлшемін көбейтіп қою. Біз үлгілеу орындар арасындағы статистикалық байланыстарын елемегеннен келеді дегенді көрсетедік. Мұндай-ақ біз өзіміздің ең жақсы моделімізмен туралы тәжірибе туралы хабарлаймыз. Бұл тек үлгілеріміздің себептеріне сәйкес келетін,  Жұмыс істеу әлі жақсы болып тұр. Біздің үлгіміз мақсатты тапсырманы оқытуға тиіс емес деп ойлайды.', 'ka': 'აპდუმენტის მიზეზი კომპრექციის საქმე არის ძალიან რთული გამოცდილება, რომელიც მნიშვნელოვანი ენის გაგრძნობა და კომპლექციური პარამენტი მსოფლიო ჩვენ კონფორტირებულია სიტყვების კოდერების გადატანისაზე უფრო კომპლექტირებული აქტიქტიქტურების გადატანისათვის, რომელიც მონაცემების პატ ჩვენი საუკეთესო მოდელი გამოყენება წინატრუქციული BiLSTM-ს გამოყენება, შემდეგ გამოყენებული სიტყვების კოდიფიკაცია, დააწყენება საქმედების განსაკუთრებული ფუნქციების განსაკუთრე ეს მოდელი მიიღება სინამდვილეო ტესტის წესიერება 61.31%-ის. კოდირების გადატანსტი უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია ჩვენი საუკეთესო მოდელზე გამოყენებული ინციალიზაციაზე. დაყოფილი პარამეტრები განსაზღვრებული დასწორებაზე რეგილარიზაცია და ეფექტიურად მონაცემების ზომას ექნება. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ რეგილარიზაცია იქნება სტატისტიკური კოლექციების განმავლობაში. ჩვენ ასევე ექსპერიმენტი ჩვენი საუკეთესო მოდელთან, რომელიც მხოლოდ დასწორებულია დასწორებების მიზეზების მიზეზების შესახებ, ი პოვპტჲპმანუთწ ვ გჟვ ჲღვ კჲნკვპვრთგნა, კჲვრჲ ოპველაზთ, ფვ ნაქთწრ მჲევლ ნვ ვ ნსზეაპნჲ ნასფთრვლვნ პაბჲრ.', 'el': 'Η εργασία κατανόησης επιχειρημάτων είναι μια δύσκολη πρόκληση που απαιτεί σημαντική κατανόηση της γλώσσας και πολύπλοκη συλλογιστική πάνω από την παγκόσμια γνώση. Εστιάζουμε στη μεταφορά ενός κωδικοποιητή προτάσεων σε πιο περίπλοκες αρχιτεκτονικές, δεδομένης του μικρού μεγέθους του συνόλου δεδομένων. Το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας χρησιμοποιεί ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο για να κωδικοποιήσει προτάσεις εισόδου, μαθαίνει ειδικά χαρακτηριστικά εργασίας για το επιχείρημα και τα εντάλματα, στη συνέχεια εκτελεί ανεξάρτητη αντιστοίχιση ορίων-ένταλμα. Αυτό το πρότυπο επιτυγχάνει τη μέση ακρίβεια συνόλου δοκιμής 61.31%. Η μεταφορά κωδικοποιητή δίνει ένα σημαντικό κέρδος στο καλύτερο μοντέλο μας πέρα από την τυχαία εκκίνηση. Η κοινή χρήση παραμέτρων για ανεξάρτητη αξιολόγηση εντάλματος παρέχει νομιμοποίηση και διπλασιάζει αποτελεσματικά το μέγεθος του συνόλου δεδομένων. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η νομιμοποίηση προέρχεται από την αγνοία στατιστικών συσχετισμών μεταξύ των θέσεων εντάλματος. Επίσης αναφέρουμε ένα πείραμα με το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας που ταιριάζει μόνο στα εντάλματα με λόγους, αγνοώντας ισχυρισμούς. Η απόδοση εξακολουθεί να είναι ανταγωνιστική, γεγονός που υποδηλώνει ότι το μοντέλο μας δεν μαθαίνει απαραίτητα το επιδιωκόμενο έργο.', 'it': "L'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task è una sfida difficile che richiede una comprensione significativa della lingua e un ragionamento complesso sulla conoscenza del mondo. Ci concentriamo sul trasferimento di un encoder di frase per avviare architetture più complicate date le piccole dimensioni del set di dati. Il nostro modello migliore utilizza un BiLSTM pre-addestrato per codificare le frasi di input, imparare le caratteristiche specifiche delle attività per l'argomento e i warrant, quindi esegue la corrispondenza indipendente argomento-warrant. Questo modello raggiunge una precisione media del set di test del 61,31%. Il trasferimento di encoder produce un significativo guadagno al nostro modello migliore rispetto all'inizializzazione casuale. La condivisione dei parametri per la valutazione indipendente del warrant fornisce regolarizzazione e raddoppia efficacemente le dimensioni del set di dati. Dimostriamo che la regolarizzazione deriva dall'ignorare le correlazioni statistiche tra posizioni di warrant. Riportiamo anche un esperimento con il nostro modello migliore che abbina solo le garanzie alle ragioni, ignorando le rivendicazioni. Le prestazioni sono ancora competitive, suggerendo che il nostro modello non sta necessariamente imparando il compito previsto.", 'ml': 'ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് വീണ്ടും പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയാണ് വ്യാല്\u200dക്കാരം ചെയ്യേണ്ടത്. ലോകത്തിന്റെ അറിവിനെക്കുറിച്ച ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ ചെറിയ വലിപ്പം കൊടുത്ത വാക്കിന്റെ കോഡെര്\u200d സ്ട്രാപ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കല്\u200dപ്പിക നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡല്\u200d ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റിംഗ് മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലനം നല്\u200dകിയ ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വാക്കുകള്\u200d കോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാ This model achieves mean test set accuracy of 61.31%.  എന്\u200dകോഡെര്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് തുടങ്ങുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡലിലേക്ക് വളരെ പ്രധാ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ വാറന്റ് വിലപാടിനുള്ള പരാമീറ്ററുകള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ വാറണ്ട് സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള സ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d അവഗണിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ന നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡലുമായി ഒരു പരീക്ഷണത്തെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. കാരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മാത് പരിധി ഇപ്പോഴും മത്സരിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലി പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമില്ല എന്ന്', 'lt': 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task is a difficult challenge requiring significant language understanding and complex reasoning over world knowledge.  We focus on transfer of a sentence encoder to bootstrap more complicated architectures given the small size of the dataset.  Mūsų geriausias modelis naudoja iš anksto apmokytą BiLSTM įvesties sakinius koduoti, mokosi konkrečių užduočių savybių argumentams ir įsakymams, tada atlieka nepriklausomą argument ų ir įsakymų derinimą. Šis modelis turi 61,31 % vidutinį bandymų rinkinio tikslumą. Kodo perdavimas suteikia reikšmingą naudą geriausiam modeliui, palyginti su atsitiktine inicializacija. Pasidalijimo parametrai nepriklausomam warranto vertinimui užtikrina reguliarizavimą ir veiksmingai padvigubina duomenų rinkinio dydį. Mes įrodome, kad reguliarizacija kyla ignoruojant statistines koreliacijas tarp įsakymų pozicijų. Mes taip pat pranešame apie eksperimentą su geriausiu modeliu, kuris atitinka tik įrodymus ir priežastis, ignoruodami teiginius. Veiksmingumas vis dar konkurencingas, o tai rodo, kad mūsų model is nebūtinai mokosi numatytos užduoties.', 'ms': 'Tugas Pemahaman Argumen adalah tantangan sukar yang memerlukan pemahaman bahasa yang signifikan dan pemahaman kompleks di atas pengetahuan dunia. Kami fokus pada pemindahan pengekod kalimat untuk bootstrap arkitektur yang lebih rumit diberikan saiz kecil set data. Model terbaik kami menggunakan BiLSTM terlatih-terlatih untuk mengekod kalimat input, belajar ciri-ciri tugas-spesifik untuk argumen dan waran, kemudian melakukan persamaan argumen-waran independen. Model ini mencapai ketepatan set ujian rata-rata 61.31%. Pemindahan pengekod menghasilkan keuntungan yang signifikan kepada model terbaik kita atas awalan rawak. Perkongsian parameter untuk penilaian waran bebas menyediakan pengaturan dan secara efektif menggandakan saiz set data. We demonstrate that regularization comes from ignoring statistical correlations between warrant positions.  We also report an experiment with our best model that only matches warrants to reasons, ignoring claims.  Performance masih kompetitif, menyarankan bahawa model kita tidak perlu belajar tugas yang ditujukan.', 'mk': 'Разумнувањето на аргументот е тежок предизвик кој бара значително разбирање на јазикот и комплексно размислување околу светското знаење. Се фокусираме на пренесувањето на кодер на реченици за да се подигнат покомплицирани архитектури со оглед на малата големина на податоците. Нашиот најдобар модел користи предобучен BiLSTM за кодирање на реченици, научи специфични функции за задачите за аргументот и налогите, потоа извршува независно парење на аргумент-налог. Овој модел постигнува просечна точност на тестот од 61,31 отсто. Пренесувањето на кодерот предизвикува значителен профит на нашиот најдобар модел преку случајна иницијализација. Параметрите за споделување на независни налоги обезбедуваат регуларизација и ефикасно ја зголемуваат големината на податоците. Демонстрираме дека регуларизацијата доаѓа од игнорирање на статистичките корелации помеѓу позициите на налог. Ние исто така пријавуваме експеримент со нашиот најдобар модел кој се совпаѓа само со налоги со причини, игнорирајќи тврдења. Резултатите сé уште се конкурентни, сугерирајќи дека нашиот модел не мора да ја научи наменетата задача.', 'mt': 'L-Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task hija sfida diffiċli li teħtieġ fehim sinifikanti tal-lingwa u raġunament kumpless madwar l-għarfien dinji. We focus on transfer of a sentence encoder to bootstrap more complicated architectures given the small size of the dataset.  L-a ħjar mudell tagħna juża BiLSTM imħarreġ minn qabel biex jikkodifika sentenzi ta’ input, jitgħallem karatteristiċi speċifiċi għal kompiti għall-argument u l-warrants, imbagħad iwettaq tqabbil indipendenti bejn argument u warrant. Dan il-mudell jikseb preċiżjoni medja tas-sett tat-test ta’ 61.31%. It-trasferiment tal-kodiċi jagħti qligħ sinifikanti lill-a ħjar mudell tagħna fuq inizjalizzazzjoni każwali. Il-parametri tal-qsim għall-evalwazzjoni indipendenti tal-mandat jipprovdu regolarizzazzjoni u effettivament jirdoppjaw id-daqs tas-sett tad-dejta. We demonstrate that regularization comes from ignoring statistical correlations between warrant positions.  Aħna nirrappurtaw ukoll esperiment bl-aħjar mudell tagħna li jaqbel biss mal-ġustifikazzjonijiet għar-raġunijiet, filwaqt li ninjoraw it-talbiet. Il-prestazzjoni għadha kompetittiva, u dan jissuġġerixxi li l-mudell tagħna mhux neċessarjament qed jitgħallem il-kompitu maħsub.', 'ro': 'Activitatea de înțelegere a argumentului este o provocare dificilă care necesită o înțelegere semnificativă a limbii și un raționament complex asupra cunoștințelor mondiale. Ne concentrăm pe transferul unui codificator de propoziții la arhitecturi mai complicate de bootstrap având în vedere dimensiunea mică a setului de date. Cel mai bun model al nostru folosește un BiLSTM pre-instruit pentru a codifica propozițiile de intrare, învață caracteristicile specifice sarcinilor pentru argument și garanții, apoi efectuează potrivirea independentă argument-mandat. Acest model atinge o precizie medie a setului de testare de 61,31%. Transferul codorului produce un câștig semnificativ pentru cel mai bun model al nostru peste inițializarea aleatorie. Partajarea parametrilor pentru evaluarea independentă a mandatului asigură regularizarea și dublează efectiv dimensiunea setului de date. Demonstrăm că regularizarea vine din ignorarea corelațiilor statistice dintre pozițiile de mandat. Raportăm, de asemenea, un experiment cu cel mai bun model al nostru care corespunde doar mandatelor cu motivele, ignorând pretențiile. Performanța este încă competitivă, sugerând că modelul nostru nu este neapărat învățarea sarcinii preconizate.', 'mn': 'Аргументийн шалтгаан төвлөрүүлэх үйл ажиллагаа бол дэлхийн мэдлэг дээр үндсэн хэл ойлголт болон комплекс ойлголт шаардлагатай хэцүү сорилт юм. Бид өгөгдлийн хэмжээний жижиг хэмжээнд илүү төвөгтэй архитектуруудыг бүтээхэд өгүүлбэр кодчуудын шилжүүлэхэд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бидний хамгийн шилдэг загвар нь урд сургалтын биLSTM-г ашиглаж, оролцох өгүүлбэрүүдийг кодлох, аргумент болон шагналын тухай ажлын тодорхойлолтуудыг суралцаж, дараа нь тогтмол аргумент-орнуудын Энэ загвар нь шалгалтын тодорхойлолт 61.31% байдаг. Кодер шилжүүлэлт санамсаргүй эхлэх үед бидний хамгийн сайн загварт маш чухал ашиг авдаг. Гүйцэтгэх эрх мэдлийн шалгалтын параметрын хуваалтын параметрыг шууд багасгаж өгөгдлийн сангийн хэмжээг үр дүнтэй хоёр дахин ихэсгэнэ. Бид тохиромжтой байдал нь статистикийн харилцааныг анзаарахгүй байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бид өөрсдийн хамгийн сайн загвартай туршилтыг мэддэг. Энэ нь зөвхөн шалтгааныг шалтгааныг зөвхөн зөвхөн шалтгааныг тэнцдэг. Цаг үйл ажиллагаа бидний загварын төлөвлөгөөг сурах хэрэггүй гэдгийг илэрхийлж байна.', 'pl': 'Zadanie zrozumienia argumentów jest trudnym wyzwaniem wymagającym znaczącego zrozumienia języka i złożonego rozumowania ponad światową wiedzą. Skupiamy się na przeniesieniu kodera zdań do bardziej skomplikowanych architektur bootstrap biorąc pod uwagę mały rozmiar zbioru danych. Nasz najlepszy model używa wstępnie przeszkolonego BiLSTM do kodowania zdań wejściowych, uczy się specyficznych funkcji dla argumentu i warrantów, a następnie wykonuje niezależne dopasowanie argumentów-warrantów. Model ten osiąga średnią dokładność zestawu testowego 61,31%. Transfer kodera daje znaczący zysk dla naszego najlepszego modelu nad losową inicjalizacją. Udostępnianie parametrów do niezależnej oceny warrantów zapewnia regularyzację i skutecznie podwaja wielkość zbioru danych. Wykazujemy, że regularyzacja wynika z ignorowania korelacji statystycznych między pozycjami warunków. Raportujemy również eksperyment z naszym najlepszym modelem, który dopasowuje tylko warunki do powodów, ignorując roszczenia. Wydajność jest nadal konkurencyjna, co sugeruje, że nasz model niekoniecznie uczy się zamierzonego zadania.', 'no': 'Argumentet «Reasoning Comprehension Task» er eit vanskeleg utfordring som krev signifikante språk forståking og komplekse utfordring over verdenskjenning. Vi fokuserer på overføring av eit setningskoder til å starta meir kompliserte arkitektur gitt den lille storleiken på datasettet. Det beste modellen vår bruker ein føretrained BiLSTM for å koda innsetsetningar, lærer oppgåvelege funksjonar for argument og ordenarar, og utfører uavhengige argument-warrant. Denne modellen gjennomsnittlig testsett nøyaktighet på 61,31%. Koderingsoverføring gjev ein signifikant fordel til vår beste modell over tilfeldig initialisering. Delingsparametrar for uavhengige warrantevaluering gjev reguleringa og gjev effektivt dobbelt storleiken på datasettet. Vi viser at regularisasjonen kommer frå å å ignorera statistiske korrelasjonar mellom ordplasseringar. Vi rapporterer også ein eksperiment med vårt beste modell som berre passar med warranter til grunner og ignorerer etterspørseler. Utføringa er fortsatt konkurrentivt, som tyder på at modellen vårt er ikkje nødvendig å lære den bestemt oppgåva.', 'sr': 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task je težak izazov koji zahteva značajno razumevanje jezika i kompleksno razmišljanje o svetskim znanjima. Fokusiramo se na prebacivanje kodera rečenice na komplikovanije arhitekture s obzirom na male veličine seta podataka. Naš najbolji model koristi predobučenu BiLSTM za kodiranje rečenica za ulazak, uči specifične funkcije zadatka za argument i naloge, a onda izvrši neovisno odgovarajuće naloge za argument. Ovaj model postiže srednju tačnost testa od 61,31%. Prebacivanje kodera pruža značajan dobitak našem najboljem modelu na slučajnoj inicijaciji. Parametri podeljenja za procjenu nezavisnog naloga pružaju regularizaciju i učinkovito povećava veličinu seta podataka. Pokazujemo da regularizacija dolazi iz ignorisanja statističkih odnosa između pozicija naloga. Takoðe prijavljujemo eksperiment sa našim najboljim modelom koji odgovara samo nalogom na razloge, ignorišući tvrdnje. Izvrsnost je i dalje konkurentna, sugerirajući da naš model ne mora da nauči namernu zadatku.', 'so': "Shaqada kaalmada ee heshiiska ah waa dhibaato adag oo looga baahan yahay fahan luuqada oo muhiim ah iyo sabab adag oo ku saabsan aqoonta dunida. Waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa wareejinta qoraalka ereyga si aan u boosto dhismaha aad u adag, taasoo lagu siiyo mid yar oo macluumaadka. Our best model uses a pre-trained BiLSTM to encode input sentences, learns task-specific features for the argument and warrants, then performs independent argument-warrant matching.  Tusaaladan wuxuu gaadhaa saxda imtixaanka oo saxda ah 61.31 boqolkiiba. Kodkiriyuhu wuxuu faa'iido weyn u keenaa modelkeeni ugu wanaagsan ee la bilaabo bilowga fudud. Heshiiska qiimeynta ogolaanshaha xor ahaanshaha ah waxaa bixiya nidaamka islamarkaasna si faa’iido leh u labanlaabiya tirada kaartaada. Waxaynu muujinnaa in xeerarka ka imaanayaa halmaamaynta xiriirka statisticada ee ka dhexeeya goobaha ruqsada. Sidoo kale waxaynu wargelinaynaa imtixaanka noogu wanaagsan, kaas oo keliya u eg ogolaanshaha sababaha dartiis, iskaga tagista dacwadda. Qorshaha waxaa weli ka mid ah iskutar, wuxuuna ka jeedaa in modellkayagu uusan si qasab ah u baran shaqada la goostay.", 'sv': 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task är en svår utmaning som kräver betydande språkförståelse och komplexa resonemang över världskunskap. Vi fokuserar på överföring av en meningskoder till bootstrap mer komplicerade arkitekturer med tanke på den lilla storleken på datauppsättningen. Vår bästa modell använder en förintränad BiLSTM för att koda inmatningsmeningar, lära sig uppgiftsspecifika funktioner för argumentet och garantierna, och utför sedan oberoende argument-garantimatchning. Denna modell uppnår en genomsnittlig testnoggrannhet på 61,31%. Kodöverföring ger en betydande vinst till vår bästa modell över slumpmässig initialisering. Att dela parametrar för oberoende utvärdering av teckningsoptioner ger regularisering och fördubblar effektivt datauppsättningens storlek. Vi visar att regularisering kommer från att ignorera statistiska korrelationer mellan optionspositioner. Vi rapporterar också ett experiment med vår bästa modell som bara matchar garantier med skäl, bortsett från anspråk. Prestanda är fortfarande konkurrenskraftig, vilket tyder på att vår modell inte nödvändigtvis lär sig den avsedda uppgiften.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නය වැඩක් අමාරුයි විශ්වාස භාෂාව තේරුම් සහ ලෝකය දන්නවයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dය අපි වාක්ය සංකේතකය ගැන බටස්ට්\u200dරෑප් කරන්න තරම් සංකේත විද්\u200dයාපෘතියක් ගැන දත්ත සැට් පොඩි ප්\u200dරමාණය දෙන අපේ හොඳම මොඩල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් බිල්ස්ටිම් එක පාවිච්චි කරනවා ඇතුළත් වාක්ය සංකේතය කරන්න, වාක මේ මොඩල් එකේ අදහස් පරීක්ෂණ සැකසුම් හරියට 61.31% තියෙනවා. එන්කෝඩර් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය අපේ හොඳම මොඩේල් එකට විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා. නිදහස් වෝරන්ට් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා දත්ත සෙට්ට අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා නියමිකරණය ස්ථානයක් අනතුරු වෙනුවෙන් සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් එනව අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් අපේ හොඳම මොඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වාර්තා කරනවා ඒක හේතුවෙන් විතරයි විතරයි, අවශ්න කාර්යාලය තාමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, අපේ මොඩල් එක අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ නැහැ කියලා.', 'ta': 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task is a difficult challenge requiring significant language understanding and complex reasoning over world knowledge.  கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சிறிய தகவல் அமைப்பு எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரி முன்பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பில்எஸ்டிஎம் வாக்கியங்களை குறியீட்டாக பயன்படுத்துகிறது, வார்த்தையும் வாக்குறிப்பிட் Name குறியாக்கி மாற்றுதல் குறிப்பிடாத த துவக்கத்திற்கு முக்கியமான பெரிய வாய்ப்பை வழங்குகிறது. சுலபமான வார்ட் மதிப்பீட்டிற்கான பகிர்ந்த அளபுருக்கள் வழங்கும் மற்றும் தரவு அமைப்பின் அளவை வெற்றிகரமாக இரட் நாம் வார்ட் நிலைகளுக்கிடையில் இருந்து புள்ளிவிவரமான இணைப்புகளை மறந்து விடுவதிலிருந்து விதிமுறை  காரணங்களுக்கு மட்டும் பொருந்தும், காரணங்களுக்கு தவிர்த்து, எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரியில் ஒரு சோதனையை அறிவிக செயல்பாடு இன்னும் போராட்டியாக இருக்கிறது, எங்கள் மாதிரி தேவையான வேலையை கற்றுக் கொள்வது தெரிவிக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task is a difficult challenge requiring significant language understanding and complex reasoning over world knowledge. ہم ایک sentence encoder کا انتقال پر مشکل کریں گے اور اس سے زیادہ پیچیدہ معماری بنانے کے لئے ڈیٹ سٹ کی چھوٹی سازی کے ذریعہ سے۔ ہمارے بہترین موڈل ایک پیش آموزش کی BiLSTM کو اینپیٹ جماعتوں کا کوڈ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے، تورینگ اور واورنٹوں کے لئے کام کا خاص ویژہ سکھاتا ہے، پھر سزاوار آرژیم-واورنٹ کے مطابق عمل کرتا ہے. یہ موڈل 61.31 درصد کی معنی تست سٹ دقیق پہنچتی ہے۔ Encoder transfer yields a significant gain to our best model over random initialization. سزاوار اورانٹ کی ارزیابی کے لئے تقسیم پارامیٹروں کا تقسیم قانونی کرتا ہے اور تابع سٹ کے سائز کو دوگنا کرتا ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ قانون تعلقات حکومت کے درمیان ایستی تعلقات کو نادانی سے آتی ہے۔ ہم نے اپنے بہترین موڈل کے ساتھ ایک آزمائش کو بھی گزاری ہے جو صرف دلیلوں کے ساتھ واورنٹوں کے مطابق مطابق ہوتی ہے۔ عملکرد ابھی بھی مسابقه ہے، اس بات سے پیش کرتا ہے کہ ہمارا مدل ضرورت کے طور پر مقرر کردہ کام کی تعلیم نہیں کرتا۔', 'vi': 'Việc Nghiêm túc Lý luận là một thử thách khó khăn đòi hỏi sự hiểu biết ngôn ngữ quan trọng và lập luận phức tạp về kiến thức thế giới. Chúng tôi tập trung vào việc chuyển giao bộ mã hóa câu để khởi động các kiến trúc phức tạp hơn dựa vào kích thước nhỏ của bộ dữ liệu. Người mẫu tốt nhất của chúng tôi sử dụng một chuẩn bị BiLSTM để mã hóa câu nhập, học các tính năng đặc biệt của nhiệm vụ cho cuộc tranh luận và giấy phép, rồi thực hiện hợp lý lập lập trình. Mẫu này đạt độ chính xác của tập thử là 61.31. Việc truyền mã hóa đem lại một lợi ích lớn cho mô hình tốt nhất hơn sự khởi tạo ngẫu nhiên. Chia sẻ các thông số cho việc đánh giá trát độc lập đem lại hiệu chỉnh và tăng gấp đôi kích thước của bộ dữ liệu. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng việc điều chỉnh là từ việc lờ đi sự liên kết thống kê giữa các vị trí. Chúng tôi cũng báo cáo một thí nghiệm với mẫu tốt nhất chỉ phù hợp với các lý do, phớt lờ các yêu cầu. Thành quả vẫn còn cạnh tranh, cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta không cần thiết phải học những nhiệm vụ được dự định.', 'uz': "Argument tizimini olish vazifasi dunyoning ta'siri uchun juda muhim tilni tushunish va murakkab g'oyalar kerak. @ info Bizning eng yaxshi modelimiz bir taʼminlovchi biLSTM soʻzlarini kodlash uchun foydalanadi, argumentlar va huquqlar uchun vazifa xossalarini o'rganadi, keyin muammolar bilan mos keladi. Name Kodlash usulini Tasodifiy ishga tayyorlash uchun eng yaxshi usulni bajaradi. @ info: whatsthis Biz tashkilotlar orasidagi statistik aloqalarini saqlash imkoniyatini tushunamiz. Biz shunday qilamiz, biz eng yaxshi modelmiz bilan bir eksperiment haqida xabar beramiz, faqat sabablar bilan o'xshash huquqlarni o'xshash mumkin. Hujjatning taqdimoti hamisha rivojlanadi, modelmiz qanday ishni o'rganish kerak emas.", 'hr': 'Zadatak za osvajanje kompresije Argument je težak izazov koji zahtijeva značajno razumijevanje jezika i kompleksno razmišljanje o svjetskim znanjima. Fokusiramo se na prebacivanje kodera rečenice na kompliciranije arhitekture s obzirom na male veličine seta podataka. Naš najbolji model koristi predobučenu BiLSTM za kodiranje rečenica za ulazak, uči specifične funkcije zadatka za argument i naloge, a onda izvrši odgovarajuće neovisne naloge za argument. Ovaj model postiže srednju točnost ispitivanja 61,31%. Prebacivanje kodera pruža značajan dobitak našem najboljem modelu na slučajnoj inicijaciji. Parametri dijeljenja za procjenu nezavisnog naloga pružaju regularizaciju i učinkovito povećava veličinu seta podataka. Pokazujemo da regularizacija dolazi iz ignoriranja statističkih odnosa između položaja naloga. Također prijavljujemo eksperiment sa našim najboljim modelom koji odgovara samo nalogovima razlogom, ignorirajući tvrdnje. Učinnost je i dalje konkurentna, ukazujući na to da naš model ne mora morati naučiti predviđeni zadatak.', 'da': 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task er en vanskelig udfordring, der kræver betydelig sprogforståelse og kompleks ræsonnement over verdenskendskab. Vi fokuserer på overførsel af en sætningskoder til bootstrap mere komplicerede arkitekturer i betragtning af datasættets lille størrelse. Vores bedste model bruger en forududdannet BiLSTM til at kode input sætninger, lærer opgavespecifikke funktioner for argumentet og garantier, og derefter udfører uafhængig argument-garantimatchning. Denne model opnår en gennemsnitlig testsæt nøjagtighed på 61,31%. Encoder overførsel giver en betydelig gevinst til vores bedste model over tilfældig initialisering. Deling af parametre til uafhængig warrantevaluering giver regulering og fordobler effektivt datasættets størrelse. Vi demonstrerer, at regulering kommer fra at ignorere statistiske korrelationer mellem warrants positioner. Vi rapporterer også et eksperiment med vores bedste model, der kun matcher garantier med årsager, idet vi ignorerer krav. Performance er stadig konkurrencedygtig, hvilket tyder på, at vores model ikke nødvendigvis lærer den påtænkte opgave.', 'nl': 'De Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task is een moeilijke uitdaging die aanzienlijk taalbegrip en complexe redenering over wereldkennis vereist. We richten ons op de overdracht van een zin encoder naar bootstrap meer gecompliceerde architecturen gezien de kleine grootte van de dataset. Ons beste model gebruikt een voorgetrainde BiLSTM om invoerzinnen te coderen, leert taakspecifieke functies voor het argument en warrants en voert vervolgens onafhankelijke argument-warrant matching uit. Dit model bereikt de gemiddelde nauwkeurigheid van de testset van 61.31%. Encoderoverdracht levert een aanzienlijke winst op aan ons beste model ten opzichte van willekeurige initialisatie. Het delen van parameters voor onafhankelijke warrantevaluatie zorgt voor regularisatie en verdubbelt effectief de grootte van de dataset. We tonen aan dat regularisatie komt door het negeren van statistische correlaties tussen warrantposities. We rapporteren ook een experiment met ons beste model dat alleen warrants aan redenen koppelt, waarbij claims worden genegeerd. Prestaties zijn nog steeds concurrerend, wat suggereert dat ons model niet noodzakelijkerwijs de beoogde taak leert.', 'bg': 'Задачата за разбиране на аргументите е трудно предизвикателство, изискващо значително езиково разбиране и сложно разсъждение над световните познания. Фокусираме се върху прехвърлянето на кодер на изречения към по-сложни архитектури предвид малкия размер на набора от данни. Нашият най-добър модел използва предварително обучен БиЛСТМ за кодиране на входни изречения, научава специфични за задачата функции за аргумента и гаранциите, след което извършва независимо съвпадение между аргументи и гаранции. Този модел постига средна точност на теста от 61,31%. Трансферът на кодер дава значителна печалба на нашия най-добър модел при случайното инициализиране. Споделянето на параметри за независима оценка на заповедта осигурява регламентиране и ефективно удвоява размера на набора от данни. Доказваме, че регламентирането идва от пренебрегване на статистическите корелации между позициите на гаранциите. Също така докладваме за експеримент с най-добрия ни модел, който съответства само на основанията, пренебрегвайки твърденията. Изпълнението все още е конкурентно, което предполага, че нашият модел не е непременно учене на предвидената задача.', 'de': 'Die Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task ist eine schwierige Herausforderung, die erhebliches Sprachverständnis und komplexe Argumentation über Weltkenntnisse erfordert. Wir konzentrieren uns auf die Übertragung eines Satzkodierers auf Bootstrap kompliziertere Architekturen angesichts der geringen Größe des Datensatzes. Unser bestes Modell verwendet ein vortrainiertes BiLSTM, um Eingabesätze zu kodieren, lernt aufgabenspezifische Funktionen für das Argument und Warrants und führt dann ein unabhängiges Argument-Warrant-Matching durch. Dieses Modell erreicht mittlere Prüfsatzgenauigkeit von 61.31%. Encoder-Transfer bringt einen signifikanten Gewinn für unser bestes Modell gegenüber zufälliger Initialisierung. Die Freigabe von Parametern für die unabhängige Warrant-Bewertung ermöglicht eine Regularisierung und verdoppelt effektiv die Größe des Datensatzes. Wir zeigen, dass Regularisierung durch das Ignorieren statistischer Korrelationen zwischen Warrantpositionen entsteht. Wir berichten auch über ein Experiment mit unserem besten Modell, das nur Warrants mit Gründen übereinstimmt und Behauptungen ignoriert. Die Leistung ist immer noch wettbewerbsfähig, was darauf hindeutet, dass unser Modell nicht unbedingt die beabsichtigte Aufgabe erlernt.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya Uhalalishaji wa Msingi ni changamoto ngumu inayohitaji kuelewa kwa lugha muhimu na kuelewa vigumu kuhusu maarifa ya dunia. Tunaweza lengo la kuhamisha kodi ya hukumu ili kuzuia majengo magumu zaidi kwa kiasi kidogo cha seti ya taarifa. Mfano wetu bora hutumia BiLSTM kwa ajili ya kutangaza hukumu za kujifunza, kujifunza vipengele maalum vya kazi kwa hoja na warrant, kisha hufanya ushahidi huru wa hoja. Mfano huu unafanikiwa kuweka sahihi ya mtihani wa kiasi cha asilimia 61.31. Uhamiaji wa kodi unaleta mafanikio makubwa kwa mtindo wetu bora zaidi kuliko kuanzishwa kwa urahisi. Kushirikisha vipimo vya uchunguzi huru vinatoa udhibiti na kwa ufanisi wa kiwango kikubwa cha taarifa. Tunaonyesha kuwa utaratibu unatokana na kusahau mahusiano ya takwimu kati ya vituo vya vitabu. Pia tunaripoti jaribio la mtindo wetu mzuri ambalo lina maana ya sababu, kutoa taarifa. Utendaji bado unashindwa, unapendekeza kwamba muundo wetu haulazima kujifunza kazi hiyo inayokusudiwa.', 'ko': '변론 추리 이해 임무는 어려운 도전으로 세계 지식에 대한 중요한 언어 이해와 복잡한 추리가 필요하다.데이터 집합의 작은 사이즈를 고려하여 우리는 문장 인코더를 더욱 복잡한 체계 구조로 전환하는 방법을 중점적으로 토론할 것이다.우리의 가장 좋은 모델은 미리 훈련된 BilSTM을 사용하여 입력 문장을 인코딩하고 매개 변수와 보증된 임무의 특정한 특징을 학습한 다음에 독립된 매개 변수를 실행하여 일치를 보증합니다.이 모델의 평균 테스트 집합의 정확도는 61.31% 이다.무작위 초기화에 비해 인코더 전송은 우리의 가장 좋은 모델에 현저한 이득을 가져왔다.독립권증 평가 공유 매개 변수를 규칙화하고 데이터 집합의 크기를 효과적으로 배로 늘렸다.우리는 정규화는 권증의 지분 간의 통계적 관련성을 소홀히 하는 데서 나온다는 것을 증명한다.우리는 또한 우리의 가장 좋은 모델로 진행된 실험을 보고했는데, 이 모델은 주주권 취득증과 이유만 일치하고 클레임을 소홀히 했다.성능이 여전히 경쟁력을 가지고 있다는 것은 우리의 모델이 반드시 기대한 임무를 학습하는 것이 아니라는 것을 나타낸다.', 'id': 'Tugas Pemahaman Argumen adalah tantangan sulit yang membutuhkan pemahaman bahasa yang signifikan dan pemahaman kompleks di atas pengetahuan dunia. Kami fokus pada transfer pengangkat kalimat untuk bootstrap arsitektur yang lebih rumit mengingat ukuran kecil dari set data. Model terbaik kami menggunakan BiLSTM terlatih untuk mengkode kalimat masukan, belajar ciri-ciri tugas-spesifik untuk argumen dan surat perintah, kemudian melakukan persamaan argumen-surat perintah independen. Model ini mencapai akurasi set ujian rata-rata 61,31%. Encoder transfer yields a significant gain to our best model over random initialization.  Berbagi parameter untuk evaluasi surat perintah independen menyediakan regularisasi dan efektif menggandakan ukuran dataset. Kami menunjukkan bahwa regularisasi berasal dari mengabaikan korelasi statistik antara posisi surat perintah. Kami juga melaporkan eksperimen dengan model terbaik kami yang hanya cocok dengan surat perintah untuk alasan, mengabaikan klaim. Performasi masih kompetitif, menyarankan bahwa model kita tidak perlu belajar tugas yang ditujukan.', 'fa': 'مطالعه\u200cای که دلیل تعقیب کردن مطالعه\u200cای است یک چالش سختی است که لازم است درک زبان\u200cهای مهم و دلیل\u200cهای پیچیده در علم جهانی باشد. ما روی انتقال یک رمزگر جمله تمرکز می کنیم تا معماری پیچیده\u200cتری را به اندازه اندازه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cها بپردازیم. بهترین مدل ما از یک BiLSTM پیش آموزش استفاده می\u200cکند تا جمله\u200cهای ورودی را رمزبندی کند، ویژگی\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای برای حکومت و حکم\u200cها یاد می\u200cگیرد، سپس اجرا می\u200cکند که با حکومت\u200cهای مستقل و مستقل اجرا می\u200cکند. این مدل به معنی دقیقات تست جمع شده 61.31 درصد رسیده است. انتقال رمز\u200cدهنده به بهترین مدل\u200cمون در انتقال تصادفی سود بزرگی می\u200cدهد. پارامترهای شریک برای ارزیابی مجوز مستقل قانون قانون قانونی را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد و به طور موثر اندازه مجموعه داده را دو برابر می\u200cکند. ما نشان می دهیم که ساده\u200cسازی از نادیده ارتباطات آمار بین موقعیت\u200cهای حکم است. ما همچنین یک آزمایش را با بهترین مدل خودمان گزارش می دهیم که تنها به دلایل اجازه\u200cهای قانونی، بی\u200cنظیر ادعا می\u200cشود. عملکرد هنوز مسابقه\u200cای است که پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که مدل ما لازم نیست که این کار را یاد بگیریم.', 'tr': 'D체n첵채 bilgi barada d체힊체nmek we 챌yky힊 d체힊체nmek 체챌in guran Argument 챌yky힊 kyn kyn챌ylykdyr. Biz s철zlem kod챌ysyny da힊yrtmak 체챌in has karma힊캇k arhitektarlaryny da힊yrtmak 체챌in 체ns ber첵채ris. Bizi흫 i흫 gowy modelimiz girdi s철zlerini kodlamak 체챌in 철흫체nden 철흫체nden bilinmeli BiLSTM ullan첵ar, zady흫 spesifikleri arg체ment we garantlary흫 체챌in 철wrenip, so흫ra ba휓캇ms캇z arg체ment garanty 체챌in 철wrenip bar첵ar. Bu nusga 61,31%-i흫 dogrylygyny bar첵ar. K철dler hilli ba힊lan챌ylykda i흫 gowy nusgymyza beter gazan첵ar. Garaz warrant de흫lemesi 체챌in pa첵la힊ma parameterleri d체zg체nle힊diril첵ar we fa첵llary흫 ululykyny k철bled edir. Biz d체zg체n d체zg체n 힊ekilde gara힊첵arys gara힊 첵erleri arasynda statistik d체zg체nlikleri 첵ok etmekden gelir. Biz hem 철z i흫 gowy nusgymyz bilen bir denedimizi a첵d첵arys. Di흫e garantlary흫 seb채plerine t채sirli bolup, iddialarymyzy 첵ok edip bilme첵채n denedimizi a첵d첵arys. D철redijilik henizem jogapk채rdir, nusgymyzy흫 maksady흫 i힊ini 철wrenmegi gerek d채ldigini maslahat ber첵채r.', 'sq': 'Argumenti që arsyeton detyrën e kuptimit është një sfidë e vështirë që kërkon kuptim të rëndësishëm gjuhësh dhe arsyetim kompleks mbi njohurinë botërore. Ne përqëndrohemi në transferimin e një koduesi të fjalëve për të nisur arkitektura më të komplikuara duke marrë parasysh madhësinë e vogël të dataset. Modeli ynë më i mirë përdor një BiLSTM të paratrajnuar për të koduar fjalët e hyrjes, mëson karakteristika specifike për detyrat për argumentin dhe urdhërat, pastaj kryen përputhje të pavarur argument-warrant. Ky model arrin pikërisht 61.31%. Encoder transfer yields a significant gain to our best model over random initialization.  Parametrat e ndarjes për vlerësimin e mandatit të pavarur ofrojnë rregullalizim dhe efektivisht dyfishojnë madhësinë e grupit të të dhënave. Ne demonstrojmë se rregullimi vjen nga injorimi i korrelacioneve statistike midis pozicioneve të mandatit. Ne raportojmë gjithashtu një eksperiment me modelin tonë më të mirë që përputhet vetëm me urdhërat për arsye, duke injoruar pretendimet. Performanca është ende konkurruese, duke sugjeruar se modeli ynë nuk është domosdoshmërisht duke mësuar detyrën e synuar.', 'am': 'የአርጉም አካባቢ ማድረግ ስራ የቋንቋ ማስተዋል እና የዓለማዊ እውቀት ማሰናከል የሚያስፈልገው ትክክለኛ ውሸት ነው፡፡ የመድረክ ክፍተት መጠን ትንሽን እንደሰጠ አካባቢ መዝገብ ማሳየትን እናስከትላለን፡፡ የተሻለሙ ምሳሌያችን የፊተኛውን የቢልSTM ውይይት የድምፅ ውይይት ለማክበር ይጠቅማል፤ የስራ-ምርጫዎች ለክርክሩ እና ትርጓሜዎችን ያስተምራል፥ ከዚያም በኋላ ነፃ አጋራጅ-warrant እንዲተካከል ያደርጋል። ይሄ ሞዴል የሚያስፈልገውን የሞከሩ ቁጥጥር 61.31 በመቶ ያገኛል። የሆሄያት ኮድ መዘዋወር በተለየ መጀመሪያ የበለጠ ምሳሌ ትልቅ ትርፍን ይሰጣል፡፡ ነፃ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ሥርዓት በተቃውሞ ቦታ መካከል የstatistical ግንኙነት ከመረሳት እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ከዋነታችን የተሻለ ምሳሌ ጋር መፈተኛ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ Performance is still competitive, suggesting that our model is not necessarily learning the intended task.', 'af': "Die Argument wat oorsaak van komprehensie taak is 'n moeilike uitdrukking wat betekende taal verstanding en kompleks redening oor wêreld kennis vereis. Ons fokus op oordrag van 'n setkoder na boot strap meer kompliseerde arkitektuur gegee het die klein grootte van die datastel. Ons beste model gebruik 'n pre- trained BiLSTM om invoer setnings te kodeer, leer taak-spesifieke funksies vir die argument en waardes, dan uitvoer onafhanklike argument-warrant ooreenstemming. Hierdie model bereik middelste toets stel presisie van 61. 31%. Enkoder oordrag gee 'n betekende verskaf aan ons beste model oor willekeurige inisialisering. Deel parameters vir onafhanklike waarskuwingevaluering verskaf regularisasie en effektief dubbel die grootte van die datastel. Ons wys dat regularisasie kom van die ignorering van statistiese verskil tussen waarskuwingposisies. Ons rapporteer ook 'n eksperiment met ons beste model wat slegs ooreenkomstig waardes tot redes, en ignoreer aandrukkings. Performasie is nog mededingvuldig, voorstel dat ons model nie noodsaaklik die bedoelde taak leer nie.", 'hy': 'The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task is a difficult challenge requiring significant language understanding and complex reasoning over world knowledge.  Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք նախադասությունների կոդավորի փոխանցման վրա, որպեսզի ավելի բարդ ճարտարապետություններ կատարենք, հաշվի առնելով տվյալների փոքր չափերը: Մեր լավագույն մոդելը օգտագործում է նախապատրաստված ԲիԼՍԹՄ-ը ներմուծքային նախադասությունների կոդավորման համար, սովորում է գործի հատուկ հատկանիշներ բանավեճի և պատվիրանների համար, հետո կատարում է անկախ բանավեճի և պատվիրանի համապատաս Այս մոդելը հասնում է փորձարկումների միջին ճշգրտության 61.31 տոկոսին: Կոդերի փոխանցումը մեծ շահույթ է տալիս մեր լավագույն մոդելի համար պատահական ինիցիալիզացիայի դեպքում: Անկախ պատվիրավոր գնահատման պարամետրերի կիսվելը հնարավորություն է տալիս վերահսկել և արդյունավետ կրկնապատկել տվյալների համակարգի չափերը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ կարգավորումը գալիս է անտեսելով վիճակագրական կապվածությունները պատվիրավոր դիրքերի միջև: Մենք նաև զեկույց ենք տալիս մեր լավագույն մոդելի հետ մի փորձ, որը միայն համապատասխանում է պատճառներին, անտեսելով փաստարկները: Արդյունքը դեռևս մրցակցություն է, առաջարկում է, որ մեր մոդելը պարտադիր չի սովորում նպատակված խնդիրը:', 'bn': 'আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরুদ্ধার করার কাজ হচ্ছে কঠিন চ্যালেঞ্জ যাতে বিশ্ব জ্ঞানের ব্যাপারে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাষা বুঝতে হব ডাটাসেটের সামান্য আকারে বুটস্ট্র্যাপ করার জন্য আমরা একটি বাক্য এনকোডার পরিবর্তনের দিকে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি। আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভাল মডেল বিএলস্টিএম ব্যবহার করে ইনপুটের বাক্য এনকোড করার জন্য, যুক্তি এবং ওয়ারেন্টের জন্য কাজের বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য শিখে, তারপর স এই মডেলের মানে পরীক্ষা বৈশিষ্ট্যের সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করে। Encoder transfer yields a significant gain to our best model over random initialization.  স্বাধীন ওয়ারেন্ট মুল্যায়নের জন্য প্যারামিটার শেয়ার করা নিয়মিত করা এবং ডাটাসেটের আকার দ্বিগুণ করে দেয়। আমরা প্রমাণ করছি যে নিয়ন্ত্রণের বিষয়টি পরিসংখ্যানের সম্পর্ক উপেক্ষা করা থেকে এসেছে। আমরা আমাদের সেরা মডেলের সাথে একটি পরীক্ষা প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করি যা কারণের মাধ্যমে মিলে যায়, দাবি উপেক্ষা করে। প্রতিযোগিতা এখনো প্রতিযোগিতা করছে, পরামর্শ দেয়া হচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেলের উদ্দেশ্য কাজ শিখতে হবে না।', 'az': "Argument Reason Comprehension Task dünya elmi üzərində möhkəm dil anlama və kompleks dəyişiklik istəyən çətinlikdir. Biz cümlənin kodlayıcısını daha karmaşık arhitektarları yükləmək üçün fərqləndiriyoruz. Bizim ən yaxşı modelimiz əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş BiLSTM'i kodlamaq üçün istifadə edir, argument və warrantlar üçün task-specific xüsusiyyətləri öyrənir, sonra bağımsız argument-warrant uyuşmaq üçün istifadə edir. Bu modellər 61,31%-in dəqiqliyinə bənzəyir. Kodlayıcı tərəfdarlığımızın ən yaxşı modeliyimizə rastgele başlanğıçlığı üzərində böyük bir fayda verər. Bağımsız warrant değerlendirməsi üçün paylaşım parametroları düzgünlük göstərir və veri qutusının böyüklüyünü artırar. Biz müəyyən olunduğunu göstəririk ki, qaydaların arasındakı statistik bağlantıları bilmədən gəlir. Biz həmçinin ən yaxşı modellərimiz ilə təcrübə edirik ki, sadəcə warrantlara uyuşur və iddiaları yox edir. İşkimiz hələ də müqayisədir, modellərimizin məqsədilə öyrənməsini təmin edir.", 'ca': "L'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task és un repte difícil que requereix una comprensió significativa del llenguatge i un raonament complexe sobre el coneixement mundial. Ens centrem en la transfer ència d'un codificador de frases per arrancar arquitectures més complicades, dada la petita mida del conjunt de dades. El nostre millor model utilitza un BiLSTM pré-entrenat per codificar frases d'entrada, aprendre característiques específices de tasca per l'argumentació i les ordens, i després fa comparació independent entre arguments i ordens. Aquest model aconsegueix una mitjana de precisió del conjunt d'exàmens del 61,31%. La transfer ència del codificador dona un guany significatiu al nostre millor model en comparació amb l'inicialització aleatòria. Compartir paràmetres per a l'evaluació de mandats independents proporciona regularització i duplica efectivament la mida del conjunt de dades. Demonstrem que la regularització prové d'ignorar les correlacions estadístiques entre posicions de mandat. També informem d'un experiment amb el nostre millor model que només coincideix amb warrants amb raons, ignorant reclamacions. El rendiment encara és competitiu, suggerent que el nostre model no està aprenent necessàriament la tasca prevista.", 'cs': 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task je obtížná výzva vyžadující významné znalosti jazyka a komplexní uvažování nad světovými znalostmi. Zaměřujeme se na přenos větového kodéru do bootstrapu složitějších architektur vzhledem k malé velikosti datové sady. Náš nejlepší model používá předem trénovaný BiLSTM pro kódování vstupních vět, učí se specifické funkce pro argument a zaručení a poté provádí nezávislé porovnání argumentů a zaručení. Tento model dosahuje střední přesnosti testovací sady 61,31%. Přenos kodéru přináší významný zisk našemu nejlepšímu modelu oproti náhodné inicializaci. Sdílení parametrů pro nezávislé hodnocení povolení zajišťuje regularizaci a efektivně zdvojnásobuje velikost datové sady. Dokazujeme, že regularizace vychází z ignorování statistických korelací mezi pozicemi příkazu. Také nahlásíme experiment s naším nejlepším modelem, který odpovídá pouze zatykačům k důvodům a ignoruje tvrzení. Výkon je stále konkurenceschopný, což naznačuje, že náš model se nemusí nutně učit zamýšlený úkol.', 'et': 'Argumenti mõistmise ülesanne on keeruline väljakutse, mis nõuab märkimisväärset keeletõistmist ja keerulist arutlemist üle maailma teadmiste. Me keskendume lausekodeerija ülekandmisele bootstrap keerulisemale arhitektuurile, arvestades andmekogumi väikest suurust. Meie parim mudel kasutab sisendlausete kodeerimiseks eelnevalt väljaõpetatud BiLSTM-i, õpib argumentide ja garantiide ülesandespetsiifilisi funktsioone ning seejärel teostab sõltumatut argumendi-garantii sobitamist. Selle mudeli keskmine katsekomplekti täpsus on 61,31%. Kodeerija ülekanne annab meie parimale mudelile märkimisväärse kasu juhusliku initsialiseerimise korral. Sõltumatu orderi hindamiseks vajalike parameetrite jagamine võimaldab seadustada ja tõhusalt kahekordistada andmekogumi suurust. Näitame, et regulariseerimine tuleneb garantiipositsioonide statistiliste korrelatsioonide eiramisest. Samuti anname teada oma parima mudeliga tehtud eksperimendist, mis vastab ainult põhjustele, ignoreerides väiteid. Tulemus on endiselt konkurentsivõimeline, mis viitab sellele, et meie mudel ei pruugi tingimata õppida kavandatud ülesannet.', 'bs': 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task je težak izazov koji zahtijeva značajno razumijevanje jezika i kompleksno razmišljanje o svetskim znanjima. Fokusiramo se na prebacivanje kodera rečenice na kompliciranije arhitekture s obzirom na male veličine seta podataka. Naš najbolji model koristi predobučenu BiLSTM za kodiranje rečenica za ulazak, uči specifične funkcije zadatka za argument i naloge, a onda izvrši odgovarajuće neovisne naloge za argument. Ovaj model postiže srednju tačnost ispitivanja 61,31%. Prebacivanje kodera pruža značajan dobitak našem najboljem modelu na slučajnoj inicijaciji. Parametri podeljenja za procjenu nezavisnog naloga pružaju regularizaciju i učinkovito povećava veličinu seta podataka. Pokazujemo da regularizacija dolazi iz ignoriranja statističkih odnosa između pozicija naloga. Također prijavljujemo eksperiment sa našim najboljim modelom koji odgovara samo nalogovima razlogom, ignorirajući tvrdnje. Učinnost je i dalje konkurentna, ukazujući na to da naš model ne mora da uči nameravan zadatak.', 'fi': 'Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task on vaikea haaste, joka vaatii merkittävää kieliymmärrystä ja monimutkaista päättelyä yli maailman tietämyksen. Keskitymme lauseenkooderin siirtämiseen bootstrap-arkkitehtuuriin datajoukon pienen koon vuoksi. Paras mallimme käyttää esikoulutettua BiLSTM-tekniikkaa syöttölauseiden koodaamiseen, oppii tehtäväkohtaiset ominaisuudet argumentille ja warranteille ja suorittaa sitten riippumattoman argumentti-warrant-yhteensopivuuden. Tämä malli saavuttaa testisarjan tarkkuuden keskimäärin 61,31%. Kooderinsiirto tuottaa merkittävän voiton parhaalle mallillemme satunnaisen alustuksen jälkeen. Riippumattoman etsintäluvan arvioinnin parametrien jakaminen mahdollistaa laillistamisen ja tosiasiassa kaksinkertaistaa aineiston koon. Osoitamme, että laillistaminen johtuu optioiden välisten tilastollisten korrelaatioiden huomioonottamisesta. Raportoimme myös parhaalla mallillamme tehdystä kokeesta, joka vastaa vain perusteita huomioiden väitteet. Suorituskyky on edelleen kilpailukykyinen, mikä viittaa siihen, että mallimme ei välttämättä opi suunniteltua tehtävää.', 'he': 'משימה ההבנה הגיונית היא אתגר קשה שדורשת הבנה משמעותית של שפת והגיון מורכב על ידע העולם. אנחנו מתמקדים בהעברה של קודד משפטים כדי להזיז ארכיטקטורות מסובכות יותר בהתחשב בגודל קטן של קבוצת המידע. המודל הטוב ביותר שלנו משתמש ב-BILSTM מאומן מראש כדי לקוד משפטים כניסה, לומד תכונות מסויימות למשימות לטיעון והצווים, ואז מבצע התאמה עצמאית צו-טיעון. המודל הזה משיג מדויקת מבחן ממוצעת של 61.31%. העברת קודד נותנת רווח משמעותי לדוגמא הטובה ביותר שלנו על התחלה אקראית. פרמטרים משותפים להערכה של צו עצמאי מספקים רפורליזציה וביעילות כפילים את גודל קבוצת הנתונים. We demonstrate that regularization comes from ignoring statistical correlations between warrant positions.  אנחנו גם מדווחים על ניסוי עם המודל הטוב ביותר שלנו שמתאים רק לצורכים לסיבות, להתעלם מהטענות. ההופעה עדיין תחרותית, מציעה שהמודל שלנו לא בהכרח לומד את המשימה המתכוונת.', 'ha': "Kayan Hazarar da Akwai Mawallafin Argument ni'ana mai ƙunci na tambayar fahimta da harshe masu muhimmi da masu husũma a kan kunnuwa duniya. Tuna fokus a kan shige kode ɗin maganar zuwa farata filayenaiki masu ƙaranci da aka samu girma da tsarin da aka danne. @ info: whatsthis @ info Sauya kode ta ƙara wani amfani mai girma ga misalinmu na fi kyauta kodi na farata. Sharing parameters wa qiymati masu inganci da ake huru, yana bãyar da jujjarin kuma yana riɓanya girmar da aka daidaita. Tuna nũna cewa Rudinarinta za ta zo daga manta da danganiya na statistic a tsakanin wurãren taskõki. Kayya, muna buga wani jarrabi da misalinmu mafi kyãwo, wanda ke daidai da matsayin karkaci, kuma masu saɓa. Performance yana ƙaranci a cikin gaura, yana gaya cewa misalinmu bã ya lazima a karanta aikin da aka ƙayyade.", 'sk': 'Razumevanje argumentov je težak izziv, ki zahteva znatno razumevanje jezika in kompleksno razmišljanje nad svetovnim znanjem. Glede na majhno velikost nabora podatkov se osredotočamo na prenos kodirnika stavkov v zapletenejše arhitekture bootstrap. Naš najboljši model uporablja vnaprej usposobljen BiLSTM za kodiranje vhodnih stavkov, nauči se specifičnih funkcij za argument in naloge, nato izvede neodvisno ujemanje argumentov-nalog. Ta model dosega povprečno natančnost preskusnega nabora 61,31%. Prenos kodirja prinaša znaten dobiček našemu najboljšemu modelu pred naključno inicializacijo. Delitev parametrov za neodvisno oceno naloga omogoča ureditev in učinkovito podvoji velikost nabora podatkov. Dokazujemo, da ureditev izhaja iz ignoriranja statističnih korelacij med pozicijami naložb. Poročamo tudi o eksperimentu z našim najboljšim modelom, ki se ujema samo z razlogi, pri čemer ne upošteva trditev. Uspešnost je še vedno konkurenčna, kar kaže, da naš model ni nujno učenje predvidene naloge.', 'jv': 'logic Anyone model model iki wis kelompok, dadi teka-teka saboh kanggo 60,31%. Ngubah section Awak dhéwé éntuk yèng beraksi punika dipun dadi ingkang dipun Awak dhéwé mung beraksi perbudhakan karo model sing luwih apik dhéwé kuwi nggawe perbudhakan kanggo masalah, Gak dhéwé ngerasakno Menu Layout', 'bo': 'སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་དཔྱད་ལས་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ཏེ། ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་གི་སྒྲ་ཚིག་འདིའི་ནང་གི་མིང་གསང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འདྲ་བཤུས་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། Our best model uses a pre-trained BiLSTM to encode input sentences, learns task-specific features for the argument and warrants, then performs independent argument-warrant matching. མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་བདེན་སྟངས་བདེན་པར་ཕྱོགས་ཉེས་ཡོད། གསང་བ་ཞིག་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་ནི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྔོན་འགོ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་མཐོ་རིམ་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡིན་པ Sharing parameters for independent warrant evaluation provides regularization and effectively doubles the size of the dataset. འུ་ཅག་གིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་ཚད་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ལས་སྣང་མེད་གཏོང་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་རྩལ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྙན་ཞུ་བྱེད་པ་དེ་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ལ་མཐུན་པ་མི་འདུག རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དེ་མ་མཐུན་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་སྤྱོད་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གྱིས་དམིགས'}
{'en': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : An Ensemble Model for Argument Reasoning Based on Hierarchical Attention', 'ar': 'BLCU_NLP في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: نموذج جماعي لاستدلال الحجج بناءً على الاهتمام الهرمي', 'pt': 'BLCU_NLP na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: Um Modelo de Conjunto para Raciocínio Argumentativo Baseado em Atenção Hierárquica', 'fr': "BLCU_NLP à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 12\xa0: Un modèle d'ensemble pour le raisonnement d'argument basé sur l'attention hiérarchique", 'es': 'BLCU_NLP en SemEval-2018 Tarea 12: Un modelo de conjunto para el razonamiento argumentativo basado en la atención jerárquica', 'ja': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval -2018 Task 12: An Ensemble Model for Argument Reasoning based on Hierarchical Attention', 'zh': 'BLCU_NLP在SemEval-2018务12:原乎论理之成也', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 टास्क 12 में BLCU_NLP: पदानुक्रमित ध्यान के आधार पर तर्क तर्क के लिए एक पहनावा मॉडल', 'ru': 'BLCU_NLP на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Ансамблевая модель аргументации на основе иерархического внимания', 'ga': 'BLCU_NLP ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: Samhail Ensemble le haghaidh Réasúnaíocht Argóine Bunaithe ar Aird Ordlathach', 'ka': 'BLCU', 'hu': 'BLCU_NLP a SemEval-2018 12. feladaton: Együttes modell a hierarchikus figyelem alapján érvelésre', 'el': 'Εργασία 12: Ένα μοντέλο συνόλου για την αιτιολογία επιχειρημάτων βασισμένο στην ιεραρχική προσοχή', 'it': "BLCU_NLP al SemEval-2018 Task 12: Un modello di ensemble per ragionare argomenti basato sull'attenzione gerarchica", 'lt': 'BLCU_NLP 2010-2018 puslapyje 12 užduotis: bendras argumentų pagrįstumo modelis, pagrįstas hierarchiniu dėmesiu', 'mk': 'BLCU_NLP на SemEval-2018 задача 12: Енсемблен модел за размислување на аргументите базиран на хиерархиско внимание', 'kk': 'BLCU_ NLP жарым- 2018 тапсырманың 12- тапсырмасында: Аргументтердің түсініктемесінің аргументтің түсініктемесін зерттеу үлгісі Hierarchical Attention негізінде', 'mn': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An Ensemble Model for Argument Reasoning Based on Hierarchical Attention', 'ms': 'BLCU_NLP pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Model Sampul untuk Memalaskan Argumen Berdasarkan Perhatian Hierarkik', 'mt': 'BLCU_NLP f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 12: Mudell Ensemble għal Raġunar ta’ Argument Ibbażat fuq Attenzjoni Erarkika', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12-ല്\u200d BLCU_ NLP: ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു സെമിബിള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d', 'no': 'BLCU_NLP på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 12: En Ensemble Model for argument-grunnlag basert på hierarkisk oppmerksomhet', 'ro': 'BLCU_NLP la SemEval-2018 Task 12: Un model de ansamblu pentru raționarea argumentelor bazat pe atenția ierarhică', 'pl': 'BLCU_NLP w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Model zespołu do uzasadniania argumentów oparty na uwadze hierarchicznej', 'sr': 'BLCU_NLP na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 12: Model proizvodnje argumentacija osnovan na hijerarhičkoj pažnji', 'si': 'BLCU_NLP at semeval-2018 Job 12: an Ensemble Model for argment Reasoning', 'so': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An Ensemable Model for Argument Reading Based on Hierarchical Attention', 'sv': 'BLCU_NLP på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: En ensemblemodell för argumentresonemang baserad på hierarkisk uppmärksamhet', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணியில் BLCU_ NLP: வெற்றிகரமான கவனத்தை அடிப்படையில் வாசிக்கும் ஒரு ஒற்றைப்படைப்பு மாதிரி:', 'ur': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An Ensemble Model for Argument Reasoning Based on Hierarchical Attention', 'vi': 'Liên kết bằng: Mô hình an ninh cho biện luận cơ bản dựa trên Hướng dẫn Hithương gia', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 vazifa 12: Hierarchical Attention asosida oʻqish uchun yetarli modul', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Ансамбълен модел за аргументно разсъждаване въз основа на йерархичното внимание', 'da': 'BLCU_NLP ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: En Ensemble Model for Argument Rating Baseret på Hierarkisk Opmærksomhed', 'nl': 'BLCU_NLP bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Een ensemblemodel voor argumentredenering gebaseerd op hiërarchische aandacht', 'hr': 'BLCU_NLP na pola ispitivanja-2018 zadatak 12: Model proizvodnje argumentacija na temelju hijerarhičke pažnje', 'de': 'BLCU_NLP bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabenstellung 12: Ein Ensemblemodell für Argument Reasoning basierend auf hierarchischer Aufmerksamkeit', 'id': 'BLCU_NLP di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Model Ensemble untuk Argument Reasoning Berdasarkan Perhatian Hierarkis', 'fa': 'BLCU', 'ko': 'BLCU NLP가SemEval-18 퀘스트 12: 차원 주의를 바탕으로 하는 논점 추리 집적 모델', 'sw': 'BLCU_NLP katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Utawala wa Kusoma Uzungumzo unaotengenezwa kwa msingi wa Tamko', 'tr': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An Ensemble Model for Argument Reasoning Based on Hierarchical Attention', 'af': "BLCU_NLP by SemEval-2018 Taak 12: ' n Ensemble Model vir Argument Reasoning Basis op Hierarchical Attention", 'sq': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An Ensemble Model for Argument Reasoning Based on Hierarchical Attention', 'am': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A Ensemable Model for Argument Reading based on Hierarchical Attention', 'hy': 'ԲԼՔ_ՆԼՊ 2018-ի «ՍեմԷվալ-2018» առաջադրանքում 12. Հիերարխիկական ուշադրության հիմնված բանավեճի ընդհանուր մոդել', 'az': "SemEval-2018 Task 12'də BLCU_NLP: Hierarchical Attention Based on Ensemble Model for Argument Reasoning", 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১২-এ বিএলসিউ_এনএলপি: হিয়ারার্কিক্যাল মনোযোগের উপর ভিত্তিক আর্গুমেন্টের জন্য একটি সাধারণ মডেল', 'bs': 'BLCU_NLP na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 12: Model proizvodnje argumentacija na temelju hijerarhičke pažnje', 'cs': 'BLCU_NLP na SemEval-2018 Úkol 12: Souborový model pro argumentní odůvodnění založený na hierarchické pozornosti', 'ca': "BLCU_NLP a SemEval-2018 tasca 12: Un model conjunt de raonament d'arguments basat en atenció xeràrquica", 'et': 'BLCU_NLP SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 12: Hierarhilisel tähelepanul põhinev argumentide mõistmise ansambli mudel', 'fi': 'BLCU_NLP SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: Hierarkiseen huomioon perustuva argumentin päättelyn ryhmämalli', 'jv': 'CLCU_NLP at semi-2008 task 12', 'he': 'BLCU_NLP ב SemEval-2018 משימה 12: מודל סמל להסביר טיעון מבוסס על תשומת לב הייררכית', 'sk': 'BLCU_NLP na SemEval-2018 Naloga 12: Ensemblni model za argumentno utemeljevanje na podlagi hierarhične pozornosti', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2018 Task 12: An Ensemble Model for Argument Reasoning Based on Hierarchical Attention'}
{'en': 'To comprehend an argument and fill the gap between claims and reasons, it is vital to find the implicit supporting warrants behind. In this paper, we propose a hierarchical attention model to identify the right warrant which explains why the reason stands for the claim. Our model focuses not only on the similar part between warrants and other information but also on the contradictory part between two opposing warrants. In addition, we use the ensemble method for different models. Our model achieves an accuracy of 61 %, ranking second in this task. Experimental results demonstrate that our model is effective to make correct choices.', 'ar': 'لفهم الحجة وسد الفجوة بين الادعاءات والأسباب ، من الضروري العثور على الضمانات الداعمة الضمنية وراءها. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذج اهتمام هرمي لتحديد الضمان الصحيح الذي يفسر سبب تأييد السبب. لا يركز نموذجنا فقط على الجزء المماثل بين الأوامر والمعلومات الأخرى ، بل يركز أيضًا على الجزء المتناقض بين أمرين متعارضين. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نستخدم طريقة التجميع لنماذج مختلفة. يحقق نموذجنا دقة تصل إلى 61٪ ، ليحتل المرتبة الثانية في هذه المهمة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا فعال في اتخاذ الخيارات الصحيحة.', 'es': 'Para comprender un argumento y llenar el vacío entre las reclamaciones y las razones, es vital encontrar las garantías de respaldo implícitas detrás. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo de atención jerárquico para identificar la orden correcta que explica por qué la razón representa la reclamación. Nuestro modelo se centra no solo en la parte similar entre las órdenes judiciales y otra información, sino también en la parte contradictoria entre dos órdenes judiciales contrarias. Además, utilizamos el método de conjunto para diferentes modelos. Nuestro modelo alcanza una precisión del 61%, ocupando el segundo lugar en esta tarea. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro modelo es eficaz para tomar decisiones correctas.', 'pt': 'Para compreender um argumento e preencher a lacuna entre reivindicações e razões, é vital encontrar as garantias implícitas de apoio por trás. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo de atenção hierárquica para identificar o direito garantido que explica o porquê do motivo da reclamação. Nosso modelo se concentra não apenas na parte semelhante entre garantias e outras informações, mas também na parte contraditória entre duas garantias opostas. Além disso, usamos o método ensemble para diferentes modelos. Nosso modelo atinge uma precisão de 61%, ocupando o segundo lugar nesta tarefa. Resultados experimentais demonstram que nosso modelo é eficaz para fazer escolhas corretas.', 'fr': "Pour comprendre un argument et combler l'écart entre les revendications et les raisons, il est essentiel de trouver les justifications implicites sous-jacentes. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle d'attention hiérarchique pour identifier le bon mandat qui explique pourquoi la raison justifie la réclamation. Notre modèle se concentre non seulement sur la partie similaire entre les bons de souscription et d'autres informations, mais également sur la partie contradictoire entre deux bons de souscription opposés. De plus, nous utilisons la méthode d'ensemble pour différents modèles. Notre modèle atteint une précision de 61\xa0%, se classant deuxième dans cette tâche. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que notre modèle est efficace pour faire les bons choix.", 'zh': '为解一论补说间,寻得背隐权证至重。 于本文中,设一层以识正权证,其说何故代索赔。 非独权证息之类也,两权证之间也。 此外,我们对不同的模样用集成法。 模形成 61% 准确率,于此第二。 实验结果表明,吾形可得而择也。', 'ja': '議論を理解し、主張と理由の間のギャップを埋めるには、暗黙の裏付けとなる令状を見つけることが重要です。この論文では、正しい令状を特定するための階層的注意モデルを提案し、その理由が主張を支持する理由を説明しています。当社のモデルは、ワラントと他の情報との間の類似部分だけでなく、2つの対立するワラントの間の矛盾する部分にも焦点を当てています。また、異なる機種にアンサンブル方式を採用している。当社のモデルは61 ％の精度を達成し、このタスクで2位にランクインしています。実験結果は、私たちのモデルが正しい選択をするのに効果的であることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Чтобы понять аргумент и заполнить пробел между претензиями и причинами, жизненно важно найти косвенные подтверждающие ордера. В этой статье мы предлагаем иерархическую модель внимания, чтобы определить правильный ордер, который объясняет, почему причина обосновывает претензию. Наша модель фокусируется не только на аналогичной части между ордерами и другой информацией, но и на противоречивой части между двумя противоположными ордерами. Кроме того, мы используем ансамблевый метод для разных моделей. Наша модель достигает точности 61%, занимая второе место в этой задаче. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель эффективна для принятия правильных решений.', 'hi': 'एक तर्क को समझने और दावों और कारणों के बीच के अंतर को भरने के लिए, पीछे निहित समर्थन वारंट ढूंढना महत्वपूर्ण है। इस पेपर में, हम सही वारंट की पहचान करने के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित ध्यान मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो बताता है कि कारण दावे के लिए क्यों खड़ा है। हमारा मॉडल न केवल वारंट और अन्य जानकारी के बीच समान भाग पर केंद्रित है, बल्कि दो विरोधी वारंटों के बीच विरोधाभासी भाग पर भी केंद्रित है। इसके अलावा, हम विभिन्न मॉडलों के लिए पहनावा विधि का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल 61% की सटीकता प्राप्त करता है, इस कार्य में दूसरे स्थान पर है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल सही विकल्प बनाने के लिए प्रभावी है।', 'ga': 'Chun argóint a thuiscint agus chun an bhearna idir éilimh agus cúiseanna a líonadh, tá sé ríthábhachtach na barántais tacaíochta intuigthe a aimsiú. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla aird ordlathach chun an barántas ceart a aithint a mhíníonn an fáth a seasann an t-éileamh. Díríonn ár múnla ní hamháin ar an bpáirt chomhchosúil idir barántais agus faisnéis eile ach freisin ar an gcuid contrártha idir dhá bharántas fhreasúra. Ina theannta sin, úsáidimid an modh ensemble le haghaidh samhlacha éagsúla. Baineann ár múnla cruinneas 61% amach, agus é sa dara háit sa tasc seo. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil ár múnla éifeachtach chun roghanna cearta a dhéanamh.', 'ka': 'თუ არგუმენტის გაგრძნობა და გაუყენება განსხვავებას და მიზეზების შორის, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ მოიძებნა ინფლიციტიური დამხმარებელი დასხვავებელი დას ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომა იერაქტიკური მოდულის მოდელი, რომელიც განვიცნობა მართლა დაწყვეტილება, რომელიც განახსენს რატომ მიზეზი იქნება შესახებ. ჩვენი მოდელი არა მხოლოდ მსგავსი ნაწილზე და სხვა ინფორმაციის შორის, მაგრამ მსგავსი ნაწილზე ორი მცხვეველი დასწორებულების შორის. დამატებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებული მოდელებისთვის სენემბლის მეტი გამოყენებთ. ჩვენი მოდელი 61%-ის წარმოდგენა, რომელიც ამ დავალებში მეორე წარმოდგენა. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი ეფექტიურია მარტივი არჩევა.', 'el': 'Για να κατανοήσουμε ένα επιχείρημα και να καλύψουμε το χάσμα μεταξύ αξιώσεων και λόγων, είναι ζωτικής σημασίας να βρούμε τα έμμεσα δικαιολογητικά υποστήριξης πίσω από αυτό. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα ιεραρχικό μοντέλο προσοχής για τον προσδιορισμό του σωστού εντάλματος, το οποίο εξηγεί γιατί ο λόγος στέκεται για την αξίωση. Το μοντέλο μας επικεντρώνεται όχι μόνο στο παρόμοιο μέρος μεταξύ των εντάλματων και άλλων πληροφοριών, αλλά και στο αντιφατικό μέρος μεταξύ δύο αντιτιθέμενων εντάλματων. Επιπλέον, χρησιμοποιούμε τη μέθοδο συνόλου για διαφορετικά μοντέλα. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 61%, που κατατάσσεται δεύτερη σε αυτό το έργο. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας είναι αποτελεσματικό για να κάνει σωστές επιλογές.', 'hu': 'Ahhoz, hogy megértsük egy érvet, és kitöltsük a követelések és indokok közötti szakadékot, létfontosságú, hogy megtaláljuk a mögötte rejlő implicit támogató parancsokat. Ebben a tanulmányban egy hierarchikus figyelemmodellt javasolunk a megfelelő parancs azonosítására, amely megmagyarázza, miért áll az ok a követelés mellett. Modellünk nem csak a parancsok és egyéb információk hasonló részére összpontosít, hanem a két ellentétes parancs közötti ellentmondásos részre is. Ezenkívül különböző modellek esetében az együttes módszert használjuk. Modellünk 61%-os pontosságot ér el ebben a feladatban a második helyen. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk hatékony a helyes döntések meghozatalára.', 'it': 'Per comprendere un argomento e colmare il divario tra rivendicazioni e ragioni, è fondamentale trovare i mandati impliciti di supporto dietro. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello di attenzione gerarchica per identificare il giusto mandato che spiega perché la ragione sta per il reclamo. Il nostro modello si concentra non solo sulla parte simile tra warrant e altre informazioni, ma anche sulla parte contraddittoria tra due warrant opposti. Inoltre, utilizziamo il metodo ensemble per diversi modelli. Il nostro modello raggiunge una precisione del 61%, posizionandosi secondo in questo compito. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro modello è efficace per fare scelte corrette.', 'lt': 'Siekiant suprasti argument ą ir užpildyti atotrūkį tarp reikalavimų ir priežasčių, labai svarbu rasti netiesioginius patvirtinamuosius orderius. Šiame dokumente siūlome hierarchinį dėmesio model į, skirtą nustatyti tinkamą orderį, kuriame paaiškinama, kodėl teiginys yra pagrįstas. Mūsų modelis daugiausia dėmesio skiria ne tik panašiai orderių ir kitos informacijos daliai, bet ir prieštaringai dviejų priešingų orderių daliai. Be to, įvairiems modeliams naudojame komplekso metodą. Mūsų modelis pasiekia 61 proc. tikslumą, antrą eilutę atliekant šią užduotį. Experimental results demonstrate that our model is effective to make correct choices.', 'mk': 'To comprehend an argument and fill the gap between claims and reasons, it is vital to find the implicit supporting warrants behind.  Во овој весник предложуваме хиерархички модел на внимание за идентификување на вистинскиот налог кој објаснува зошто причината стои за тврдењето. Нашиот модел се фокусира не само на сличниот дел помеѓу налогите и другите информации, туку и на контрадикторниот дел помеѓу две противни налоги. Покрај тоа, го користиме методот на ансемблот за различни модели. Нашиот модел постигнува прецизност од 61%, рангирајќи втор во оваа задача. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел е ефикасен за правилните избори.', 'kk': 'Аргументті түсіну және сұрақтар мен себептердің арасындағы аралығын толтыру үшін, артындағы қолдау орындарын табу үшін маңызды. Бұл қағазда, біз иерархиялық назар үлгісін таңдау үшін дұрыс орранды анықтау үшін ұсынамыз. Бұл себептердің себебін түсіндіреді. Біздің үлгіміз тек ортандар мен басқа мәліметтер арасындағы ұқсас бөлігіне көздейді, сондай-ақ екі қарсы ортандар арасындағы қарсы бөлігіне көздейді. Қосымша, біз басқа үлгілер үшін енсембул әдісін қолданамыз. Біздің үлгіміз 61% деген дұрыстығын жеткізеді. Бұл тапсырманың екінші ретінде орнатылады. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің үлгіміз дұрыс таңдау үшін эффективті деп көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Untuk memahami argumen dan mengisi ruang antara klaim dan alasan, penting untuk mencari waran sokongan implicit di belakang. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar model perhatian hierarkis untuk mengenalpasti waran yang betul yang menjelaskan mengapa alasan berdiri untuk tuntutan. Model kita tidak hanya fokus pada bahagian yang sama antara waran dan maklumat lain tetapi juga pada bahagian yang bertentangan antara dua waran bertentangan. Selain itu, kami menggunakan kaedah ensemble untuk model yang berbeza. Model kita mencapai ketepatan 61%, peringkat kedua dalam tugas ini. Keputusan percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kita berkesan untuk membuat pilihan yang betul.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വാദ്യാഭ്യാസം മനസ്സിലാക്കാനും കാരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കാനും പിന്നില്\u200d പിന്നി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ മോഡല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അത് എന്തിനാണ് ഈ വാറണ്ടിന്റെ കാരണം നില്\u200dക്ക ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വാറണ്ടുകള്\u200dക്കും മറ്റു വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ഒരേ ഭാഗത്തില്\u200d മാത്രമല്ല, രണ്ട് വാറന്\u200dറുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില അതുകൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള ഏന്\u200dസ്പെല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d 61 ശതമാനത്തിന്റെ ശരിയാണ് പ്രാപിക്കുന്നത്, ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തെ റാങ്ങ് ചെയ്യു പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ശരിയായ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തമാണെന്ന് തെളിയിക്കുന', 'mn': 'Аргументийг ойлгох, шалтгаануудын хоорондын ялгааг дүүргэх нь, ард нь дэмжих шалтгаануудыг олох нь чухал. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эрхийн анхаарал загварыг тайлбарлахын тулд зөв шалтгааныг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний загвар нь зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн бусад мэдээлэл болон зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зө Түүнчлэн бид өөр загваруудын арга загварыг ашигладаг. Бидний загвар нь 61%-ийн тодорхойлолтой, энэ даалгаварын хоёр дахь хэмжээний тодорхойлолтой байдаг. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний загвар нь зөв сонголтыг хийхэд үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Biex wieħed jifhem argument u jimla d-distakk bejn it-talbiet u r-raġunijiet, huwa vitali li jinstabu l-mandati impliċiti ta’ appoġġ wara. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell ta’ attenzjoni ġerarkika biex jiġi identifikat il-mandat it-tajjeb li jispjega għaliex ir-raġuni hija l-pretensjoni. Il-mudell tagħna jiffoka mhux biss fuq il-parti simili bejn il-mandati u informazzjoni oħra iżda wkoll fuq il-parti kontradittorja bejn żewġ mandati opposti. Barra minn hekk, aħna nużaw il-metodu ensemble għal mudelli differenti. Il-mudell tagħna jikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 61%, li tikklassifika t-tieni f’dan il-kompitu. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna huwa effettiv biex tagħmel għażliet korretti.', 'ro': 'Pentru a înțelege un argument și pentru a umple decalajul dintre pretenții și motive, este vital să găsim mandatele implicite de sprijin din spate. În această lucrare, propunem un model de atenție ierarhică pentru identificarea mandatului corect care explică de ce motivul stă la baza revendicării. Modelul nostru se concentrează nu numai pe partea similară dintre mandate și alte informații, ci și pe partea contradictorie dintre două mandate opuse. În plus, folosim metoda ansamblului pentru diferite modele. Modelul nostru atinge o acuratețe de 61%, clasându-se pe locul doi în această sarcină. Rezultatele experimentale demonstreaza ca modelul nostru este eficient pentru a face alegeri corecte.', 'no': 'For å forstå eit argument og fylle mellomrommet mellom søk og grunnene, er det viktig å finna dei implisitte støttande ordenarane bak. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit hierarkisk oppmerksmodell for å identifisera den rette ordenaren som forklarer hvorfor grunnen står for tiltak. Modellen vårt fokuserer ikkje berre på den liknande delen mellom garanti og andre informasjon, men også på den kontradiktore delen mellom to mottakande garanti. I tillegg bruker vi den ensemblemmetoden for ulike modeller. Modellen vårt gjer noko nøyaktighet på 61 %, som rankerer sekund i denne oppgåva. Eksperimentale resultat viser at modellen vår er effektiv for å gjera rette val.', 'pl': 'Aby zrozumieć argument i wypełnić lukę między roszczeniami a uzasadnieniami, konieczne jest znalezienie ukrytych warunków wspierających. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy hierarchiczny model uwagi mający na celu zidentyfikowanie właściwego nakazu, który wyjaśnia, dlaczego powód stoi dla roszczenia. Nasz model skupia się nie tylko na podobnej części między warrantami a innymi informacjami, ale także na sprzecznej części między dwoma warrantami przeciwnymi. Ponadto stosujemy metodę zespołu dla różnych modeli. Nasz model osiąga dokładność 61%, drugą w tym zadaniu. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model jest skuteczny w dokonywaniu właściwych wyborów.', 'sr': 'Da bi shvatio argument i ispunio prazninu između zahtjeva i razloga, važno je pronaći implicitne naloge za podršku. U ovom papiru predlažemo hijerarhijski model pažnje da identifikuje pravu nalog koji objašnjava zašto je razlog za tvrdnju. Naš model se fokusira ne samo na slični deo između naloga i drugih informacija, nego i na suprotno delo između dva suprotnog naloga. Osim toga, koristimo metodu ensemble za različite modele. Naš model postiže tačnost od 61%, u ovom zadatku se reduje drugi. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš model efikasan da napravimo ispravne izbore.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තේරුම් ගන්න සහ හේතුවක් අතර අතර පුරවන්න, ඒක පිටිපස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න විශේෂයි. මේ පත්තරේ අපි සැලසුම් කරනවා හේතුව ඇයි කියලා කියන්නේ. අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරධානය විතරයි අනිත් තොරතුරු සහ අනිත් තොරතුරු අතර සමාන කොටස් විතරයි නෙවෙයි නමුත් විරුද්ධ ඒ වගේම, අපි වෙනස් මෝඩල් වලට ඇන්සෙම්බල් විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අපේ නිර්මාණය 61% විශේෂතාවක් ලැබෙනවා, මේ වැඩේ දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් ලැබෙනවා. පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ මොඩේල් එක හරි තීරණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයි.', 'so': 'Si aad u heshid muran islamarkaasna aad u buuxiso kala duwanaanshaha arrimaha iyo sababaha dhexdooda, waa muhiim in aad raadsato ogolaanshiyaha kaalmada ee ku saabsan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa model daryeelka hierarkiisa si aan u caddeyno ogolaanshiyaha xaqa ah, taasoo fasiraya sababta ay ugu taagan tahay dacwadda. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu ku kalsoonaadaa qeyb isku mid ah oo u dhexeeya ogolaanshaha iyo macluumaadka kale ee ku saabsan qeybta ka duwan ee u dhexeeya labada ogolaanshaha ka geesta ah. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu u isticmaalnaa qaabab kala duduwan. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa saxda 61 boqolkiiba, shaqadan labaad. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in modellkayagu uu shaqaynayo inuu sameeyo doorasho saxda ah.', 'sv': 'För att förstå ett argument och fylla gapet mellan anspråk och skäl är det viktigt att hitta de underförstådda stödjande teckningsoptionerna bakom. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en hierarkisk uppmärksamhetsmodell för att identifiera rätt fullmakt vilket förklarar varför orsaken står för anspråket. Vår modell fokuserar inte bara på den liknande delen mellan teckningsoptioner och annan information utan också på den motsägelsefulla delen mellan två motstående teckningsoptioner. Dessutom använder vi ensemblemetoden för olika modeller. Vår modell uppnår en noggrannhet på 61%, rankas tvåa i denna uppgift. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell är effektiv för att göra rätt val.', 'ta': 'ஒரு வார்த்தையை புரிந்து கொள்ள மற்றும் காரணங்களுக்கும் இடைவெளிப்பாட்டை நிரப்புவதற்கு, பின்னால் உள்ள ஆதரவு வார இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முன்னேற்றும் கவனத்தின் மாதிரி தேர்ந்தெடுத்து சரியான வார்த்தையை கண்டுபிடி எங்கள் மாதிரி வார்டர்கள் மற்றும் மற்ற தகவல்களுக்கும் இடையே ஒரே பகுதியில் மட்டும் கவனம் செலுத்துவது மட்டும் அல்ல, இரண்டு எதி மேலும், நாம் முறைமையை வேறு மாதிரிகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் மாதிரி இந்த வேலையில் இரண்டாவது வரிசையில் ஒரு சரியான மதிப்பை பெறுகிறது. முயற்சி முடிவுகள் சரியான தேர்வுகளை செய்ய எங்கள் மாதிரி செயலாகும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'ur': 'کہ ایک دلیل سمجھ سکیں اور درخواست اور دلیلوں کے درمیان فاصلہ پورا کریں، اس کے پیچھے ایک غلط مدد کرنے والی حکومت پانا ضروری ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک حکومت کی توجه موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ درست واورند کو پہچان سکیں جو واضح کرتا ہے کیونکہ دلیل ادعا کے لئے ہے۔ ہماری مدل صرف واورینٹ اور دوسری معلومات کے درمیان برابر قسمت پر تمرکز نہیں کرتا بلکہ دو مخالف واورینٹ کے درمیان مخالف قسمت پر بھی ہے اور ہم مختلف موڈل کے لئے انسبل طریقہ استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری مدل 61% کی دقیق پہنچتی ہے، اس کام میں دوسری رقم کرتی ہے۔ آزمائش کے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل درست انتخاب کرنے کے لئے مفید ہے.', 'uz': "To comprehend an argument and fill the gap between claims and reasons, it is vital to find the implicit supporting warrants behind.  Bu qogʻozda, biz haqiqiqiy huquqlarni aniqlash uchun yetarlicha foydalanuvchi modelini anglatamiz. Biz modelmiz faqat huquqlar va boshqa maʼlumotlar orasidagi bir qismga qaramadi, balki ikkita ta'minlovchi huquqlar orasidagi murakkab qismda. Ko'pchilik, biz boshqa modellarga foydalanamiz. Bizning modelmiz shu vazifaning ikkinchi darajada 61 foizga ega bo'ladi. Tekshirish natijalari modelmiz to ʻgʻri tanlash uchun ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Để hiểu được một lý lẽ và lấp đầy khoảng trống giữa các yêu cầu và lý do, cần thiết phải tìm ra các trát căn cứ nằm đằng sau. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình chú ý cấp bậc để xác định đúng trát, lý do đó là nguyên nhân của yêu cầu. Mẫu của chúng tôi không chỉ tập trung vào một phần tương tự giữa các trát bắt và các thông tin khác mà còn vào một phần mâu thuẫn giữa hai trát chống đối. Chúng tôi cũng dùng phương pháp kết hợp cho các mô hình khác nhau. Mô hình của chúng ta đạt độ chính xác 61=, thứ hai trong nhiệm vụ này. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta có hiệu quả để đưa ra lựa chọn đúng.', 'bg': 'За да се разбере даден аргумент и да се запълни празнината между претенции и причини, е жизненоважно да се намерят имплицитните подкрепящи заповеди зад тях. В настоящата статия предлагаме йерархичен модел на внимание за идентифициране на правилната гаранция, който обяснява защо причината стои за претенцията. Нашият модел се фокусира не само върху сходната част между гаранциите и друга информация, но и върху противоречивата част между две противоположни гаранции. В допълнение, използваме метода на ансамбъл за различни модели. Нашият модел постига точност от 61%, класирайки се на второ място в тази задача. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел е ефективен за правилния избор.', 'hr': 'Da bi razumjeli argument i ispuniti prazninu između zahtjeva i razloga, ključno je pronaći implicitne potporne naloge iza sebe. U ovom papiru predlažemo hijerarhički model pažnje da identificira pravu nalog koja objašnjava zašto je razlog za tvrdnju. Naš model se fokusira ne samo na slični dio između naloga i drugih informacija, već i na suprotno dijelu između dva suprotnog naloga. Osim toga, koristimo metodu ensemble za različite modele. Naš model postiže točnost 61%, u ovom zadatku se reduje drugi. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš model učinkovit da napravimo ispravne izbore.', 'nl': 'Om een argument te begrijpen en de kloof tussen claims en redenen op te vullen, is het essentieel om de impliciete ondersteunende warrants erachter te vinden. In dit artikel stellen we een hiërarchisch aandachtsmodel voor om de juiste warrant te identificeren, wat verklaart waarom de reden voor de claim staat. Ons model richt zich niet alleen op het gelijkaardige deel tussen warrants en andere informatie, maar ook op het tegenstrijdige deel tussen twee tegengestelde warrants. Daarnaast gebruiken we de ensemblemethode voor verschillende modellen. Ons model bereikt een nauwkeurigheid van 61%, op de tweede plaats in deze taak. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model effectief is om juiste keuzes te maken.', 'da': 'For at forstå et argument og udfylde hullet mellem krav og årsager, er det afgørende at finde de implicitte understøttende warrants bag. I denne artikel foreslår vi en hierarkisk opmærksomhedsmodel for at identificere den rigtige kendelse, som forklarer, hvorfor årsagen står for kravet. Vores model fokuserer ikke kun på den lignende del mellem warrants og andre oplysninger, men også på den modstridende del mellem to warrants. Derudover bruger vi ensemblemetoden til forskellige modeller. Vores model opnår en nøjagtighed på 61%, rangerer andenpladsen i denne opgave. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model er effektiv til at træffe korrekte valg.', 'de': 'Um ein Argument zu verstehen und die Lücke zwischen Ansprüchen und Gründen zu schließen, ist es unerlässlich, die impliziten unterstützenden Warrants dahinter zu finden. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein hierarchisches Aufmerksamkeitsmodell vor, um den richtigen Warrant zu identifizieren, welches erklärt, warum der Grund für den Anspruch steht. Unser Modell konzentriert sich nicht nur auf den ähnlichen Teil zwischen Warrants und anderen Informationen, sondern auch auf den widersprüchlichen Teil zwischen zwei gegensätzlichen Warrants. Darüber hinaus verwenden wir die Ensemblemethode für verschiedene Modelle. Unser Modell erreicht eine Genauigkeit von 61%, Rang zwei in dieser Aufgabe. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell effektiv ist, um richtige Entscheidungen zu treffen.', 'fa': 'برای فهمیدن یک حجت و پر کردن فاصله بین ادعا و دلایل، برای پیدا کردن قانون پشتیبانی معمولی مهم است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل توجه قانونی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا قانون درستی را شناسایی کند که توضیح می\u200cدهد چرا دلیل این ادعا است. مدل ما نه تنها بر قسمت مشابه بین حکم\u200cها و اطلاعات دیگر تمرکز می\u200cکند، بلکه همچنین بر قسمت مخالف بین دو حکم\u200cهای مخالف. علاوه بر این، ما از روش انجمن برای مدل های مختلف استفاده می کنیم. مدل ما دقیق 61 درصد را می رساند که در این وظیفه درجه دومین درجه است. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما برای تصمیم درستی موثر است.', 'ko': '하나의 논점을 이해하기 위해서는 주장과 이유 사이의 공백을 메우고 그 뒤에 숨겨진 지지 이유를 찾는 것이 중요하다.본고에서 우리는 권리 증명서를 식별하기 위해 층별 주의 모델을 제시했는데 이것은 왜 클레임의 원인을 설명했다.우리의 모델은 권증과 다른 정보 간의 비슷한 부분을 주목할 뿐만 아니라 두 상반된 권증 간의 모순 부분도 주목한다.그 밖에 우리는 서로 다른 모델에 대해 집적 방법을 사용했다.우리의 모델은 61%의 정확도에 이르렀으며 이 임무에서 2위를 차지했다.실험 결과, 우리의 모델은 효과적으로 정확한 선택을 할 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'id': 'Untuk memahami argumen dan mengisi ruang antara klaim dan alasan, penting untuk menemukan surat perintah mendukung implicit di belakang. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model perhatian hierarkis untuk mengidentifikasi surat perintah yang tepat yang menjelaskan mengapa alasan berdiri untuk klaim. Our model focuses not only on the similar part between warrants and other information but also on the contradictory part between two opposing warrants.  Selain itu, kami menggunakan metode ensemble untuk model yang berbeda. Model kita mencapai akurasi 61%, peringkat kedua dalam tugas ini. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita efektif untuk membuat pilihan yang benar.', 'sw': 'Kuelewa hoja na kukijaza tofauti kati ya madai na sababu, ni muhimu kupata viungo vya kuunga mkono. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza modeli ya uangalizi wa kivitabu ili kutambua warrant sahihi ambayo inaeleza kwa nini sababu inasimama kwa madai hayo. Our model focuses not only on the similar part between warrants and other information but also on the contradictory part between two opposing warrants.  Zaidi ya hayo, tunatumia mbinu za muonekano tofauti. Mfano wetu unafanikiwa uhakika wa asilimia 61, kwa kiwango cha pili katika kazi hii. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu una ufanisi wa kutengeneza chaguo sahihi.', 'tr': 'Argümü anlamak ve iddialer ve sebepler arasındaki boşluğu doldurmak, arkadaki içerisindeki içerikli destekleme garanti bulmak önemli. Bu kagyzda biz iýerarhiýa üns nusgasyny dogry garaňy tanyşdyrmak üçin teklip edip görýäris. Bu sebäpden näme üçin iddia edilýändigini düşünýär. Biziň modelimiz diňe garanti we başga maglumatyň arasynda ýaly bölüme üns bermez, ýöne iki garşy garanti arasynda rakip bölüme üns berýär. Ayrıca, farklı nusgalar üçin ensemble yöntemini ulanýarys. Biziň nusgymyz 61%-iň takyklygyny başarýar, bu işiň ikinji derejesi. Aramanyň netijeleri biziň modelimiziň saýlawlary dogry etmek üçin täsirli bolandygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Om 'n argument te verstaan en die gap tussen aansoek en redes te vul, is dit vitaal om die inplisite ondersteunde waardes agter te vind. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n hierarkies aandag model om die regterwaarskuwing te identifiseer wat verduidelik waarom die rede vir die aandrukking staan. Ons model fokus nie alleen op die gelyke deel tussen waarmee en ander inligting nie, maar ook op die kontrakteerde deel tussen twee teensteldige waarmee. In addition, we use the ensemble method for different models. Ons model bereik 'n presies van 61%, ranking tweede in hierdie taak. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons model effektief is om korrekte keuses te maak.", 'sq': 'Për të kuptuar një argument dhe për të mbushur dallimin midis pretendimeve dhe arsyeve, është thelbësore të gjejmë mandatet e mbështetjes implicitete prapa. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model të vëmendjes hierarkike për të identifikuar mandatin e duhur që shpjegon pse arsyeja qëndron për pretendimin. Modeli ynë përqëndrohet jo vetëm në pjesën e ngjashme midis urdhërave dhe informacioneve të tjera, por gjithashtu në pjesën kundërshtuese midis dy urdhërave kundërshtuese. Përveç kësaj, ne përdorim metodën e ansamblit për modele të ndryshme. Modeli ynë arrin një saktësi 61%, renditje e dytë në këtë detyrë. Experimental results demonstrate that our model is effective to make correct choices.', 'hy': 'Որպեսզի կարողանանք հասկանալ բանավեճը և լրացնել ճշմարտությունների և պատճառների միջև բացառությունը, կարևոր է հետևում գտնել ենթադրական աջակցող պատվիրանները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հիերարխիկ ուշադրության մոդել ճիշտ պատվիրան հայտնաբերելու համար, որը բացատրում է, թե ինչու է պատճառը պայմանավորված: Our model focuses not only on the similar part between warrants and other information but also on the contradictory part between two opposing warrants.  Ավելին, մենք տարբեր մոդելների համար օգտագործում ենք համակարգչային մեթոդը: Մեր մոդելը ստանում է 61 տոկոսի ճշգրտություն, որը երկրորդ դասակարգում է այս խնդրում: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը արդյունավետ է ճիշտ ընտրություններ կայացնելու համար:', 'az': 'Argumenti anlamaq və iddiaların və səbəblərinin arasındakı boşluqları doldurmaq üçün, arxalarında müəyyən dəstək əmrini tapmaq vacibdir. Bu kağızda, biz hiyerarşik təsiri modeli təklif edirik ki, haqqı təsdiqləyən warrant ı təsdiqləsin, bu səbəb niyə təsdiqlənməsini təsdiqləyir. Modelimiz yalnız warrantlər və digər məlumatlar arasındakı bənzər parçaya odaqlanır, ancaq iki müqavilə warrantların arasındakı müqavilə parçasına da odaqlanır. Əvvəlcə, müxtəlif modellər üçün ensemble metodlarını istifadə edirik. Bizim modelimiz 61%-in doğruluğuna nail olur, bu işdə ikinci dərəcə verir. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları modelimiz doğru seçmək üçün etkilidir.', 'am': 'To comprehend an argument and fill the gap between claims and reasons, it is vital to find the implicit supporting warrants behind.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ እውነተኛውን ፍርድ ለማግኘት የሐይራርክክስል ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ምሳሌያችን በሁለት ተቃዋሚው warrants መካከል በተቃዋሚ ክፍል ላይ ብቻ አይደለም፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ልዩ ዓይነቶች የሚጠቀሙትን ዓይነት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የ61 በመቶ እርግጠኛ አግኝቷል፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ምሳሌያችን የተሻለ ምርጫዎችን ለማድረግ ጥቅም እንዲያደርጋል ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'যুক্তি বুঝতে এবং দাবি এবং কারণের মধ্যে বিভ্রান্তি পূর্ণ করার জন্য, পেছনে যাওয়ার্নার সমর্থন করা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি হিরেরাক্কিল মনোযোগ মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি সঠিক ওয়ারেন্ট চিহ্নিত করার জন্য যা ব্যাখ্যা করেছে কেন দাবী আমাদের মডেল শুধুমাত্র ওয়ারান্ট এবং অন্যান্য তথ্যের মধ্যে একই অংশের দিকে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছে না, বরং দুই বিরোধী ওয়ারান্ট এছাড়াও, আমরা বিভিন্ন মডেলের জন্য এনস্বেল পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করি। Our model achieves an accuracy of 61%, ranking second in this task.  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল সঠিক সিদ্ধান্ত নিতে কার্যকর।', 'bs': 'Da bi shvatili argumentu i ispuniti prazninu između zahtjeva i razloga, važno je pronaći implicitne naloge za podršku. U ovom papiru predlažemo hijerarhijski model pažnje da identifikuje pravu nalog koji objašnjava zašto je razlog za tvrdnju. Naš model se fokusira ne samo na slični dio između naloga i drugih informacija, već i na suprotno dijelu između dva suprotnog naloga. Osim toga, koristimo metodu ensemble za različite modele. Naš model postiže tačnost 61%, u ovom zadatku se reduje drugi. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš model efikasan da napravimo ispravne izbore.', 'ca': "Per entendre un argument i llençar la diferència entre reclamacions i raons, és vital trobar les mandates implícites de suport darrere. En aquest paper, proposem un model d'atenció jeràrquica per identificar la orden correcta que explica per què la raó és la reclamació. El nostre model es centra no només en la part semblant entre mandats i altres informacions, sinó també en la part contradictoria entre dues mandats oponents. A més, utilitzem el mètode d'ensemble per a diferents models. El nostre model aconsegueix una precisió del 61%, segona en aquesta tasca. Els resultats experimentals demostren que el nostre model és eficaç per prendre eleccions correctes.", 'cs': 'Chcete-li pochopit argument a vyplnit mezeru mezi nároky a důvody, je nezbytné nalézt implicitní podpůrné oprávnění. V tomto článku navrhujeme hierarchický model pozornosti pro identifikaci správného příkazu, který vysvětluje, proč je důvod pro nárok. Náš model se zaměřuje nejen na podobnou část mezi warranty a dalšími informacemi, ale také na protichůdnou část mezi dvěma protichůdnými warranty. Kromě toho používáme metodu souboru pro různé modely. Náš model dosahuje přesnosti 61%, na druhém místě v tomto úkolu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model je efektivní pro správná volba.', 'et': 'Argumenti mõistmiseks ning nõuete ja põhjuste vahelise lõhe täitmiseks on väga oluline leida kaudsed toetavad orderid. Käesolevas töös pakume välja hierarhilise tähelepanu mudeli, et tuvastada õige garantii, mis selgitab, miks põhjus seisneb nõude. Meie mudel keskendub mitte ainult samalaadsele osale warrantide ja muu teabe vahel, vaid ka kahe vastuolulise warrandi vahel. Lisaks kasutame erinevate mudelite jaoks ansambli meetodit. Meie mudel saavutab 61% täpsuse, mis on selles ülesandes teisel kohal. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel on tõhus õigete valikute tegemiseks.', 'fi': 'Väitteen ymmärtämiseksi ja vaatimusten ja syiden välisen kuilun täyttämiseksi on tärkeää löytää taustalla olevat implisiittiset tukiluvat. Tässä työssä ehdotamme hierarkkista huomiomallia oikean etsintäluvan tunnistamiseksi, mikä selittää syyn vaatimukselle. Mallimme keskittyy optio-oikeuksien ja muun tiedon samankaltaiseen osaan, mutta myös kahden vastakkaisen optio-oikeuden ristiriitaiseen osaan. Lisäksi käytämme ensemble-menetelmää eri malleissa. Mallimme saavuttaa 61 prosentin tarkkuuden, joka sijoittuu toiseksi tässä tehtävässä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme on tehokas oikeiden valintojen tekemisessä.', 'jv': 'Genjer-genjer argument nganggo perusahaan winih lan saka kenapa sawalih Nanging mapun iki, kita mudhaya model akeh pancen kanggo kejahatan aturan awak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan winih dhéwé, kuwi mau ngerasakno perusahaan adhil kejahatan winih. model kita dipoleh kanggo langgar sampeyan kelas nang banter Nambah, kita wis nggambar model tambah kanggo sampeyan model. Nampur-model iki dadi ono wektu kelas nêmêr, dadi sabané sekondi iki ning acara dadi. Pametuné sing paling nggambaran daké modelu awak dhéwé iso nggawe cah-cawisé sing apik.', 'ha': 'To domin ka fahimta wani argument kuma ka cika gaɓanci a tsakanin daidai da sababuwa, sai na muhimu a gane huɗen bayan. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata misãlin muhimmada wa hieriarkiki dõmin a gane wa ruwan da ke da inganci da ke bayyana wanne saba na tsaye wa daidai. @ info: whatsthis Da wannan, za mu yi amfani da shirin ayuka na dabam-daban. Tuduniyarmu ya sami tsari na 61%, yana da sauran na biyu cikin wannan aikin. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa misalinmu yana da amfani don ya sami zaɓallin sahiya.', 'he': 'כדי להבין טיעון ולמלא את הפער בין טענות וסיבות, זה חיוני למצוא את צוות התמיכה המיוחדים מאחור. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים דוגמנית תשומת לב היררכית לזהות את צו הנכון שמסביר למה הסיבה עומדת לתבועה. המודל שלנו מתמקד לא רק בחלק דומה בין צווים ומידע אחר, אלא גם בחלק ההתנגדות בין שני צווים מתנגדים. בנוסף, אנחנו משתמשים בשיטת האנסמבל למודלים שונים. הדוגמא שלנו משיגה מדויקה של 61%, מדרגה שנייה במשימה הזאת. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהמודל שלנו יעיל כדי לעשות בחירות נכונות.', 'sk': 'Za razumevanje argumentov in zapolnitev vrzeli med zahtevki in razlogi je ključnega pomena, da najdemo implicitne podporne naloge za njimi. V prispevku predlagamo hierarhični model pozornosti za ugotavljanje pravega naloga, ki pojasnjuje, zakaj je razlog za zahtevek. Naš model se ne osredotoča le na podoben del med nalogi in drugimi informacijami, temveč tudi na protislovni del med dvema nasprotujočima nalogama. Poleg tega uporabljamo ansambelno metodo za različne modele. Naš model doseže natančnost 61%, ki je v tej nalogi drugi. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je naš model učinkovit pri sprejemanju pravilnih odločitev.', 'bo': 'To comprehend an argument and fill the gap between claims and reasons, it is vital to find the implicit supporting warrants behind. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྒྲིག་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་འདི་ལྟར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་དཔོན་རིགས་ཞིག་དང་། Our model focuses not only on the similar part between warrants and other information but also on the contradictory part between two opposing warrants. འོན་ཀྱང་། མ་དབྱིབས་སྔར་མི་འདྲ་བ་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་བདེ་འཇལ་སར་བཞིན་ན61%(accuracy)ཡིན་ཏེ། ལག་ལེན་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ན་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གདམ་ཁ་ལེན་བྱེད་སྟངས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'fr': 'YNU Deep at SEMEVAL-2018 Task 12\xa0: Un modèle BilsTM avec attention neuronale pour la compréhension du raisonnement des arguments', 'ar': 'YNU Deep في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: نموذج BiLSTM مع الاهتمام العصبي لفهم المنطق المنطقي', 'es': 'YNU Deep en la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2018: Un modelo BilsTM con atención neuronal para la comprensión del razonamiento argumentativo', 'pt': 'YNU Deep na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: Um Modelo BiLSTM com Atenção Neural para Compreensão de Raciocínio de Argumentos', 'zh': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 务12:有神经意之BiLSTM,以论理解', 'hi': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'ja': 'YNU Deep at SemEval -2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Understanding', 'ru': 'YNU Deep на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Модель BiLSTM с нейронным вниманием для понимания аргументации', 'ga': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: Samhail BiLSTM le Aird Néarach d’Argóint Tuiscint ar Réasúnaíocht', 'ka': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'el': 'Καθήκον 12: Ένα μοντέλο με Νευρική Προσοχή για την Κατανόηση της αιτιολογίας των επιχειρημάτων', 'hu': 'YNU Deep a SemEval-2018 12. feladat: egy BiLSTM modell, amely idegi figyelmet nyújt az érvek érvelésére', 'it': "YNU Deep al SemEval-2018 Task 12: Un modello BiLSTM con attenzione neurale per la comprensione della ragione dell'argomento", 'lt': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'mk': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'kk': 'YNU жарым- 2018 тапсырмасы 12: Аргументтердің себептерін түсіндіру үшін BiLSTM моделі', 'ms': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12: അര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കൊണ്ട് ഒരു ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റം മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'mn': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'no': 'YNU Deep at semiEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'pl': 'YNU Deep w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Model BiLSTM z neuronową uwagą na zrozumienie argumentów', 'ro': 'YNU Deep la SemEval-2018 Task 12: Un model BiLSTM cu atenție neurală pentru înțelegerea argumentelor', 'sr': 'YNU duboko na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 12: Model BiLSTM sa neurološkom pažnjom za komprenciju razloga Argumenta', 'si': 'YNu Deep at Halfeval-2018 Job 12: a BiLSTM Model with neural Attension for Reasoning Comprebension', 'so': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reading Comprehension', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் YNU ஆழமாக 12: பில்எஸ்டி மாதிரி பொருள் முடித்தலுக்கு ஒரு பில்ஸ்டி மாதிரி', 'ur': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'sv': 'YNU Deep på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: En BiLSTM-modell med neural uppmärksamhet för argumentresonemang förståelse', 'vi': 'Tập trung trung vào SemEvl-tê 8 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Chú ý for Argument Lý luận Compention', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Модел с неврално внимание за разбиране на аргументите', 'nl': 'YNU Deep bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Een BiLSTM model met neurale aandacht voor het begrijpen van argumenten', 'hr': 'YNU duboko na zadatku 12: Model BiLSTM sa neurološkom pažnjom za komprenziju razloga Argumenta', 'da': 'YNU Deep på SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: En BiLSTM model med neural opmærksomhed på argumentbegrundelse forståelse', 'de': 'YNU Deep bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 12: Ein BiLSTM-Modell mit neuronaler Aufmerksamkeit für das Verständnis von Argumenten', 'id': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'fa': 'عمیق YNU در ماموریت ۱۲۰۸: یک مدل BiLSTM با توجه عصبی برای تعقیب دلایل دلایل ارجмент', 'sw': 'YNU inazunguka katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Modeli ya BiLSTM yenye msimamo wa kisasa kwa ajili ya Ufunguzi wa Uhanga', 'tr': 'YNU Derin at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'ko': 'YNU Deep이Sem Eval-18 퀘스트 12: 추리 이해를 논증하는 신경 주의에 사용되는 BilSTM 모델', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'am': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'hy': 'YNDeep in Halewal-2018', 'az': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১২: আর্গুমেন্টের পুনরুদ্ধারের জন্য নিউরেল মনোযোগ দিয়ে একটি বিএলস্টিম মডেল', 'bs': 'YNU duboko u zadatku 12: BiLSTM model sa neurološkom pažnjom za komprenziju razloga argumentacija', 'ca': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'cs': 'YNU Deep na SemEval-2018 Úkol 12: BiLSTM model s neurální pozorností pro porozumění argumentů', 'et': 'YNU sügav SemEval-2018 ülesanne 12: BiLSTM mudel, millel on neuroalne tähelepanu argumentide mõistmise arusaamiseks', 'fi': 'YNU Deep SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: BiLSTM-malli, jossa on hermohuomiota argumenttien järkeilyn ymmärtämiseen', 'jv': 'YNU deep at semi-2008 task 12', 'sk': 'YNU Deep na nalogi 12 SemEval-2018: Model BiLSTM z nevralno pozornostjo za razumevanje argumentov', 'ha': 'YNU Depth at SemEal-2018 Tafiyar 12: A BiLStM Model with Neural AttAttemption for Argument Resuming Comprehension', 'he': 'YNU עמוק ב SemEval-2018 משימה 12: מודל BiLSTM עם תשומת לב נוירואלית להבינה הגיונית לטעון', 'bo': 'YNU Deep at SemEval-2018 Task 12: A BiLSTM Model with Neural Attention for Argument Reasoning Comprehension'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Enabling a computer to understand a text so that it can answer comprehension questions is still a challenging goal of NLP. We propose a Bidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) model that reads two sentences separated by a delimiter to determine which warrant is correct. We extend this model with a neural attention mechanism that encourages the model to make reasoning over the given claims and reasons. Officially released results show that our system ranks 6th among 22 submissions to this task.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام المقدم إلى SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Conclusion Task). لا يزال تمكين الكمبيوتر من فهم النص حتى يتمكن من الإجابة على أسئلة الفهم هدفًا صعبًا في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. نقترح نموذج LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه (BiLSTM) يقرأ جملتين مفصولتين بمحدد لتحديد أي أمر صحيح. نقوم بتوسيع هذا النموذج بآلية الانتباه العصبي التي تشجع النموذج على التفكير في الادعاءات والأسباب المعينة. تظهر النتائج التي تم إصدارها رسميًا أن نظامنا يحتل المرتبة السادسة من بين 22 عملية إرسال لهذه المهمة.', 'es': 'Este documento describe el sistema presentado a la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2018 (La tarea de comprensión del razonamiento del argumento). Permitir que una computadora entienda un texto para que pueda responder preguntas de comprensión sigue siendo un objetivo desafiante de la PNL. Proponemos un modelo LSTM bidireccional (BilSTM) que lee dos oraciones separadas por un delimitador para determinar qué orden es correcta. Ampliamos este modelo con un mecanismo de atención neuronal que alienta al modelo a razonar sobre las afirmaciones y razones dadas. Los resultados publicados oficialmente muestran que nuestro sistema ocupa el sexto lugar entre 22 envíos a esta tarea.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema submetido à Tarefa 12 do SemEval-2018 (A Tarefa de Compreensão do Raciocínio de Argumentos). Permitir que um computador entenda um texto para que ele possa responder a perguntas de compreensão ainda é um objetivo desafiador da PNL. Propomos um modelo LSTM Bidirecional (BiLSTM) que lê duas sentenças separadas por um delimitador para determinar qual garantia está correta. Estendemos este modelo com um mecanismo de atenção neural que encoraja o modelo a raciocinar sobre as alegações e razões dadas. Os resultados divulgados oficialmente mostram que nosso sistema ocupa o 6º lugar entre 22 envios para esta tarefa.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système soumis à SEMEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Permettre à un ordinateur de comprendre un texte afin qu'il puisse répondre à des questions de compréhension reste un objectif difficile de la PNL. Nous proposons un modèle LSTM bidirectionnel (BilsTM) qui lit deux phrases séparées par un délimiteur afin de déterminer quel mandat est correct. Nous étendons ce modèle avec un mécanisme d'attention neuronale qui encourage le modèle à raisonner sur les allégations et les raisons données. Les résultats publiés officiellement montrent que notre système se classe au 6e rang parmi les 22 soumissions pour cette tâche.", 'ja': '本稿では， SemEval -2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning理解タスク)に提出されたシステムについて述べる。理解の質問に答えることができるように、コンピュータがテキストを理解できるようにすることは、NLPの依然として困難な目標です。双方向LSTM （ BiLSTM ）モデルを提案し、区切り記号で区切られた2つの文を読み取って、どのワラントが正しいかを判断します。私たちはこのモデルを神経注目メカニズムで拡張し、モデルが与えられた主張と理由に対して推論を行うことを奨励します。公式に発表された結果によると、当社のシステムはこのタスクへの22の提出物の中で6位に位置しています。', 'zh': '本文述提交SemEval-2018 Task 12(论理解)之统。 使计算机能通文本,以应NLP一挑战性也。 吾为双向LSTM(BiLSTM)形,读取两句,以定权证是也。 吾以神经意广之,劝给定声明而理之。 官方发之的结果表明,系统于此者22请排名第6位。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 टास्क 12 (तर्क तर्क समझ कार्य) को प्रस्तुत की गई प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है। एक कंप्यूटर को एक पाठ को समझने में सक्षम करना ताकि यह समझ के सवालों के जवाब दे सके, अभी भी एनएलपी का एक चुनौतीपूर्ण लक्ष्य है। हम एक द्विदिश LSTM (BiLSTM) मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो यह निर्धारित करने के लिए एक सीमांकक द्वारा अलग किए गए दो वाक्यों को पढ़ता है कि कौन सा वारंट सही है। हम इस मॉडल को एक तंत्रिका ध्यान तंत्र के साथ विस्तारित करते हैं जो मॉडल को दिए गए दावों और कारणों पर तर्क देने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करता है। आधिकारिक तौर पर जारी किए गए परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा सिस्टम इस कार्य के लिए 22 प्रस्तुतियों के बीच 6 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе описывается система, представленная задаче 12 SemEval-2018 (Задача понимания аргументации). Предоставление компьютеру возможности понимать текст, чтобы он мог отвечать на вопросы о понимании, по-прежнему является сложной целью NLP. Мы предлагаем двунаправленную модель LSTM (BiLSTM), которая читает два предложения, разделенные разделителем, чтобы определить, какой из них правильный. Мы расширяем эту модель с помощью механизма нейронного внимания, который побуждает модель делать рассуждения по данным пунктам и причинам. Официально опубликованные результаты показывают, что наша система занимает 6-е место среди 22 заявок на выполнение этой задачи.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a cuireadh isteach chuig Tasc 12 SemEval-2018 (Tasc Tuisceana Réasúnaíochta na hAireachta). Tá sé fós ina sprioc dhúshlánach ag NLP cur ar chumas ríomhaire téacs a thuiscint ionas gur féidir leis ceisteanna tuisceana a fhreagairt. Molaimid múnla Déthreo LSTM (BiLSTM) a léann dhá abairt scartha le teorannóir chun a chinneadh cé acu barántas atá ceart. Déanaimid an tsamhail seo a leathnú le meicníocht aire néarúil a spreagann an tsamhail réasúnaíocht a dhéanamh ar na héilimh agus na cúiseanna a thugtar. Léiríonn torthaí a eisíodh go hoifigiúil go bhfuil ár gcóras sa 6ú háit i measc 22 aighneacht don tasc seo.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που υποβλήθηκε στην εργασία 12 (Η εργασία κατανόησης επιχειρημάτων). Η δυνατότητα σε έναν υπολογιστή να κατανοήσει ένα κείμενο έτσι ώστε να μπορεί να απαντήσει σε ερωτήσεις κατανόησης εξακολουθεί να είναι ένας προκλητικός στόχος του ΝΛΠ. Προτείνουμε ένα αμφίδρομο μοντέλο που διαβάζει δύο προτάσεις χωρισμένες με οριοθετικό για να καθορίσει ποιο ένταλμα είναι σωστό. Επεκτείνουμε αυτό το μοντέλο με έναν μηχανισμό νευρικής προσοχής που ενθαρρύνει το μοντέλο να κάνει συλλογισμό σχετικά με τους δεδομένους ισχυρισμούς και λόγους. Τα επίσημα δημοσιευμένα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται 6η μεταξύ των 22 υποβαλλόμενων σε αυτό το έργο.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task) című rendszert. Az NLP továbbra is kihívást jelent, hogy lehetővé tegye egy számítógép számára egy szöveg megértését, hogy megválaszolhasson a megértési kérdésekre. Javasolunk egy kétirányú LSTM (BiLSTM) modellt, amely két mondatot olvas el egy határolóval elválasztva annak meghatározására, hogy melyik parancs helyes. Ezt a modellt egy idegi figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmussal bővítjük, amely arra ösztönzi a modellt, hogy indokolja az adott állításokat és okokat. A hivatalosan közzétett eredmények azt mutatják, hogy rendszerünk a hatodik helyen áll a 22 feladat közül.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის შეტყობინება სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval-2018 დავალება 12 (აპგუმენტის მიზეზი კომპრენციის დავალება). კომპიუტერის შესაძლებლობა ტექსტის გაგრძელება, რომ შესაძლებელია გაგრძელება კითხვების შესახებ NLP-ის შესახებ. ჩვენ გვეყველა ორედირექციონალური LSTM (BiLSTM) მოდელს, რომელიც ორი სიტყვა, განყოფილი დელიმიტერზე, განსაზღვრებლად, რომელიც დაწყვეტილია. ჩვენ ამ მოდელს ნეიროლური დაახლოებით მექანიზმით, რომელიც მოდის მოდელს დაახლოებით განახლოების და მიზეზების შესახებ. ჲტთუთალნჲ ჲბჟლსზვნთ პვჱსლრართ ოჲკაჱგარ, ფვ ნაქარა ჟთჟრვმა ვ 6-ა ჲე 22 ოპველჲზვნთწ ნა რაჱთ პაბჲრა.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive il sistema presentato a SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Consentire a un computer di comprendere un testo in modo da poter rispondere alle domande di comprensione è ancora un obiettivo impegnativo della PNL. Proponiamo un modello bidirezionale LSTM (BiLSTM) che legge due frasi separate da un delimitatore per determinare quale mandato è corretto. Estendiamo questo modello con un meccanismo di attenzione neurale che incoraggia il modello a ragionare sulle affermazioni e le ragioni date. I risultati pubblicati ufficialmente mostrano che il nostro sistema si colloca al sesto posto tra le 22 proposte presentate a questo compito.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біртінші - 2018 тапсырмасына жүйені 12- тапсырмасына жіберілген жүйені (Аргументтің түсініктерін шешу тапсырмасы). Компьютердің мәтін түсінуін рұқсат ету үшін оның түсініктеме сұрақтарына жауап беру - әлі NLP- тың көмекші мақсаты. Біз қос бағытталған LSTM (BiLSTM) үлгісін ұсынамыз, ол кез келген жолдарды анықтау үшін бөлшектеу үшін екі сөзді оқу үшін. Біз бұл үлгі келтірілген сұрақтар мен себептердің арқылы түсініктіру үшін невралдық түсініктеме механизмімен кеңейту. Қазіргі шығарылған нәтижелер, жүйеміздің 22-ші тапсырманың 6-ші жолын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama sistema, pateikta 12 užduotyje „SemEval-2018“ („Argumento pagrindimo išsami užduotis“). Įgalinti kompiuterį suprasti tekstą, kad jis galėtų atsakyti į supratimo klausimus, vis dar yra sunkus NLP tikslas. Siūlome dvikrypčio LSTM (BiLSTM) model į, kuriame skaitomi du sakiniai, atskirti ribotuvu, siekiant nustatyti, kuris įsakymas yra teisingas. Šis modelis išplečiamas naudojant neurologinio dėmesio mechanizmą, kuris skatina model į pagrįsti konkrečius teiginius ir priežastis. Oficialiai paskelbti rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų sistema yra šešta iš 22 pranešimų apie šią užduotį.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува системот поднесен на SemEval-2018 задача 12 (задача за размислување на аргументите). Овозможувањето на компјутерот да разбере текст за да може да одговори на прашањата за разбирање е сé уште предизвикувачка цел на НЛП. Предложуваме двоупотребен модел на LSTM (BiLSTM) кој чита две реченици одделени од одредувач за да се одреди кој налог е точен. Го прошируваме овој модел со механизам на нервно внимание кој го охрабрува моделот да прави размислување околу дадените тврдења и причини. Официјално објавени резултати покажуваат дека нашиот систем се рангира на шестото место меѓу 22 поднесувања на оваа задача.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar ke SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Membenarkan komputer untuk memahami teks supaya ia dapat menjawab soalan pemahaman masih satu tujuan mencabar NLP. Kami cadangkan model LSTM dua arah (BiLSTM) yang membaca dua kalimat yang dipisahkan oleh pembatas untuk menentukan waran mana yang betul. Kami memperluas model ini dengan mekanisme perhatian saraf yang mendorong model untuk membuat alasan atas klaim dan alasan yang diberikan. Keputusan yang secara rasmi menunjukkan bahawa sistem kita berturut-turut ke-6 diantara 22 tunjukan kepada tugas ini.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12 കൊടുക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു ഒരു കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d ഒരു പദാവലി മനസ്സിലാക്കുവാന്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് അതിന് ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ബൈദിഡയലില്\u200d LSTM (ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റം) മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് രണ്ട് വാക്കുകള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നു. ഏത് വാറണ്ട് ശരിയാണെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മാതൃകയുമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ മോഡലിനെ വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് മോഡലിനെ പ്രബോധിപ്പിക്ക നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ആറാമത്തേത് ഈ ജോലിയിലേക്ക് കീഴടങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema sottomessa lil SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Il-possibbiltà li kompjuter jifhem test sabiex ikun jista’ jwieġeb mistoqsijiet ta’ komprensjoni għadha għan ta’ sfida tal-NLP. Aħna nipproponu mudell ta’ LSTM Bidirezzjonali (BiLSTM) li jaqra żewġ sentenzi separati minn delimitatur biex jiġi ddeterminat liema mandat huwa korrett. Aħna jestendu dan il-mudell b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni newrali li jinkoraġġixxi lill-mudell biex jagħmel raġunament dwar it-talbiet u r-raġunijiet mogħtija. Ir-riżultati rilaxxati uffiċjalment juru li s-sistema tagħna tinsab fis-sitt fost it-22 sottomissjoni għal dan il-kompitu.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task) руу дамжуулагдсан системийг тайлбарладаг. Компьютерийг текст ойлгохын тулд ойлголтын асуултуудыг хариулж чадна гэвэл NLP-ын шаардлагатай зорилго. Бид хоёр өгүүлбэрийг хэд зөв тодорхойлдохын тулд хоёр загварын LSTM (BiLSTM) загварын санал болгож байна. Бид энэ загварыг мэдрэлийн анхаарлын механизмаар нэмэгдүүлнэ. Энэ загварыг өгөгдсөн утга болон шалтгаануудын талаар ойлгох боломжтой болгодог. Үүний үндсэн үр дүн нь бидний систем энэ ажил дээр 22 дахин 6-р байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Denne papiren beskriver systemet som er sendt til halvEval-2018 oppgåve 12 (Oppgåva for komprehensing av argumentet for grunnlag). Slå på ein datamaskin for å forstå eit tekst slik at det kan svara på forståelse spørsmål er fortsatt eit vanskeleg mål for NLP. Vi foreslår eit bikdirektionalt LSTM- modell (BiLSTM) som lesar to setningar skilde av ei delimiter for å bestemme kva garant er rett. Vi utvidar denne modellen med ein neuraloppmerksmekanisme som styrer modellen til å gjera rasjon over dei oppgjevne grensene og grunnene. Offisielt utgjeven resultat viser at systemet vår reknar 6. mellom 22 oppgåva.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system zgłoszony do SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Umożliwienie komputerowi zrozumienia tekstu tak, aby mógł on odpowiedzieć na pytania zrozumienia jest nadal trudnym celem NLP. Proponujemy dwukierunkowy model LSTM (BiLSTM), który odczytuje dwa zdania oddzielone ogranicznikiem, aby określić, który warrant jest poprawny. Rozszerzamy ten model o mechanizm uwagi neuronowej, który zachęca model do rozumowania nad danymi twierdzeniami i powodami. Oficjalnie opublikowane wyniki pokazują, że nasz system jest szóstym miejscem wśród 22 zgłoszeń do tego zadania.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul prezentat SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Permiterea unui computer să înțeleagă un text astfel încât să poată răspunde la întrebări de înțelegere este încă un obiectiv provocator al PNL. Propunem un model LSTM bidirecțional (BiLSTM) care citește două propoziții separate de un delimitator pentru a determina care mandat este corect. Extindem acest model cu un mecanism de atenție neurală care încurajează modelul să facă raționament asupra afirmațiilor și motivelor date. Rezultatele publicate oficial arată că sistemul nostru se situează pe locul 6 dintre cele 22 de trimiteri la această sarcină.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut zadatku 12 za pola Evala-2018 (zadatak za komprenziju Argumenta). Uključujući kompjuter da razume tekst tako da može odgovoriti na pitanja razumijevanja je i dalje izazovni cilj NLP-a. Predlažemo model LSTM (BiLSTM) koji čita dve rečenice odvojene od delimiter a kako bi utvrdili koji je nalog ispravan. Proširimo ovaj model sa mehanizam neurološke pažnje koji poticava model da razgovara o određenim zahtjevima i razlogima. Zvanično objavljeni rezultati pokazuju da naš sistem čini 6. među 22 podataka ovom zadatku.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 12 විදියට පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා. පරිගණකයට පාළුවක් තේරුම් ගන්න සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න එතකොට ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි දෙපාර්ථික LSTM (BiLSTM) නිර්මාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා වාක්ෂා දෙකක් කියනවා කියලා වාක්ෂා කිරීමිටර් වලින අපි මේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල් අවධාන පද්ධතියක් එක්ක, ඒකෙන් මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා දෙන්න ති ප්\u200dරධානියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ පද්ධතියේ මේ වැඩේට පිළිබඳු', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka loo soo dhiibay shaqada SemEval-2018 12 (Shaqada Heshiiska heshiiska). Kambiyuutarku waxey awoodi kartaa in uu barto qoraal, si ay ugu jawaabi karto su'aalaha aasaasiga ah weli waa goal adag oo NLP ah. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa Tusaale LSTM (BiLSTM) oo qoraya laba erayood oo uu ka soocay nidaamka si uu u ogaado in ogolaanshaha uu hagayo. Tusaalkan waxaan ku fidinaynaa meymisyo daryeelka daboolka ah oo ku dhiirrigeliya modelka inay ka fikiraan dacwada iyo sababaha la siiyay. Arrimaha rasmiga ah ee la soo daayay waxay muuqataa in nidaamkayaga ay ka mid yihiin 6aad oo ka mid ah 22 samooyin shaqadan.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver systemet som skickats in till SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Att göra det möjligt för en dator att förstå en text så att den kan svara på förståelsefrågor är fortfarande ett utmanande mål för NLP. Vi föreslår en tvåriktad LSTM (BiLSTM) modell som läser två meningar åtskilda av en avgränsare för att avgöra vilken fullmakt som är korrekt. Vi utökar denna modell med en neural uppmärksamhetsmekanism som uppmuntrar modellen att resonera över givna påståenden och skäl. Officiellt publicerade resultat visar att vårt system rankas 6:e bland 22 inlämningar till denna uppgift.', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2018 பணி 12 க்கு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பை இந்த தாள் விளக்குகிறது (குறிப்பு பூர்த்தி செய்யும் பணி). ஒரு கணினி உரையை புரிந்து கொள்ள செயல்படுத்துகிறது, அதனால் அது சூழ்நிலை கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் கூடுதல் இன்னும் NLP இன்  நாம் ஒரு இருதிசை LSTM (பில்STM) மாதிரி திருத்துகிறோம். அது இரண்டு வாக்குகளை வாசிக்கிறது என்பதை சரியாக தீர்வு செய்ய வேண்டும கொடுக்கப்பட்ட காரணங்களையும் காரணங்களையும் பற்றி விவாதம் செய்ய இந்த மாதிரியை நாம் விரிவாக்குகிறோம். அரசியலாக வெளியிட்ட முடிவுகள் இந்த பணிக்கு எங்கள் கணினியில் 6வது உள்ளது என்று காட்டுகிறது.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ کی سیسٹم کو SemEval-2018 ٹاکس 12 (آرکومنٹ Reasoning Comprehension Task) پر پیش کیا گیا ہے۔ ایک کمپیوٹر کو متعلق سمجھنے کے لئے فعال کرنا ہے تاکہ وہ سمجھنے کے سوال کا جواب دے سکتا ہے یہاں تک بھی NLP کا ایک مشکل موقع ہے. ہم ایک دودہرانی LSTM (BiLSTM) موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو دو جماعتیں پڑھتا ہے جو ایک ڈیلیمیٹر سے جدا ہوتے ہیں کہ مقرر کریں کہ کون واورنس درست ہے. ہم نے اس مدل کو ایک نئورل توجه مکانیسم کے ساتھ پھیلایا ہے جو مدل کو اجازت دینے کے لئے مطابق اور دلیلوں کے بارے میں بحث کرنے کے لئے رغبت دیتا ہے۔ رسمی نتیجے ظاہر کرتے ہیں کہ ہماری سیسٹم 22 مسلمانوں میں 6 درجے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval- 2018 Vazifani 12 (Argument oʻqish vazifasi) ga joʻnatilgan tizimni anglatadi. Enabling a computer to understand a text so that it can answer comprehension questions is still a challenging goal of NLP.  Biz Bidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) modelini talab qilamiz. Bu ruxsat haqiqiqiy emas deb aniqlash uchun ikkita so'zni oʻqish. Biz bu modelni neyrolik muhablik mechanisining orqali o'zgartiraymiz. Bu modelni foydalanadigan so'zlarni va sabablarni o'rganish mumkin. Official released natijalari shu vazifa uchun bizning tizimmiz 22 muammolardan 6 marta yetdan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống được gửi đến Nhiệm vụ SemEvol-208 (Nhiệm vụ quy trình biện lý luận). Việc cho máy tính hiểu một văn bản để nó có thể trả lời các câu hỏi thấu hiểu vẫn là một mục tiêu đầy thử thách của Njala. Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình LSD hai chiều (BiLSTM) có thể đọc hai câu được cách nhau bởi một nhà phân cách để xác định lệnh bắt đúng. Chúng ta mở rộng mô hình này với một cơ chế tập trung thần kinh khuyến khích mô hình để đưa ra lập luận về những yêu cầu và lý do đã đưa ra. Kết quả chính thức được công bố cho thấy hệ thống đang nằm trong số 62 người chịu trách nhiệm này.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft het systeem dat is ingediend bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12 (De Argument Reasoning Comprehension Taak). Een computer in staat stellen een tekst te begrijpen zodat deze begrijpvragen kan beantwoorden is nog steeds een uitdagend doel van NLP. We stellen een Bidirectioneel LSTM (BiLSTM) model voor dat twee zinnen leest gescheiden door een scheidingsteken om te bepalen welke warrant correct is. We breiden dit model uit met een neuraal aandachtsmechanisme dat het model aanmoedigt om redenering te maken over de gegeven claims en redenen. Officieel gepubliceerde resultaten tonen aan dat ons systeem 6e rangschikt onder de 22 inzendingen voor deze taak.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav podignut zadatku 12 za pola Eval-2018 (zadatak za osvajanje argumenta). Uključujući kompjuter da razumije tekst tako da može odgovoriti na pitanja razumijevanja još uvijek je izazovni cilj NLP-a. Predlažemo model LSTM (BiLSTM) koji čita dvije rečenice odvojene od delimiter a kako bi utvrdili koji je nalog ispravan. Proširimo ovaj model sa mehanizam neurološke pažnje koji poticava model da razgovara o određenim zahtjevima i razlicama. Zvanično objavljeni rezultati pokazuju da naš sustav čini 6. među 22 podataka ovom zadatku.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, подадена на задача 12 (Задачата за разбиране на аргументите). Позволяването на компютър да разбира текст, така че да може да отговори на въпроси за разбиране, все още е предизвикателна цел на НЛП. Предлагаме двупосочен модел, който чете две изречения, разделени с разделител, за да определи коя заповед е правилна. Разширяваме този модел с механизъм на невронно внимание, който насърчава модела да прави разсъждения по дадените твърдения и причини. Официално публикуваните резултати показват, че нашата система се нарежда на 6-о място сред 22-те кандидати за тази задача.', 'da': 'Dette dokument beskriver det system, der er indsendt til SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). At give en computer mulighed for at forstå en tekst, så den kan besvare forståelsesspørgsmål, er stadig et udfordrende mål for NLP. Vi foreslår en Bidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) model, der læser to sætninger adskilt af en afgrænser for at afgøre, hvilken kendelse der er korrekt. Vi udvider denne model med en neural opmærksomhedsmekanisme, der opfordrer modellen til at gøre ræsonnement over de givne påstande og årsager. Officielt offentliggjorte resultater viser, at vores system rangerer 6. blandt 22 indsendelser til denne opgave.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang dikirim ke SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Membolehkan komputer memahami teks sehingga dapat menjawab pertanyaan pemahaman masih menjadi tujuan yang menantang dari NLP. Kami mengusulkan model LSTM bidireksi (BiLSTM) yang membaca dua kalimat terpisah oleh pembatas untuk menentukan surat perintah yang benar. Kami memperluas model ini dengan mekanisme perhatian saraf yang mendorong model untuk membuat alasan atas klaim dan alasan yang diberikan. Hasil yang secara resmi menunjukkan bahwa sistem kita berturut-turut ke-6 diantara 22 pengiriman tugas ini.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das System, das an SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task) eingereicht wurde. Ein Computer in die Lage zu versetzen, einen Text zu verstehen, damit er Verständnisfragen beantworten kann, ist nach wie vor ein herausforderndes Ziel von NLP. Wir schlagen ein Bidirektionales LSTM (BiLSTM) Modell vor, das zwei Sätze liest, die durch ein Trennzeichen getrennt sind, um festzustellen, welcher Warrant korrekt ist. Wir erweitern dieses Modell um einen neuronalen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, der das Modell ermutigt, über die gegebenen Behauptungen und Gründe nachzudenken. Offiziell veröffentlichte Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser System sechster unter den 22-Einreichungen für diese Aufgabe ist.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18퀘스트12(논점 추리 이해 퀘스트)에 제출되는 시스템을 묘사한다.컴퓨터로 하여금 텍스트를 이해하고 문제를 이해하게 하는 것은 여전히 NLP의 도전적인 목표이다.우리는 양방향 LSTM(BilSTM) 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 분리부호로 구분된 두 문장을 읽어서 어느 주주권 취득증이 정확한지 확인한다.우리는 일종의 신경주의 메커니즘으로 이 모델을 확장했다. 이 메커니즘은 이 모델이 주어진 성명과 이유를 추리하도록 장려한다.공식 발표 결과 우리 시스템은 22개의 제출 임무 중 6위에 올랐다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo uliotolewa kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 12 (Kazi ya Kusoma Uhalalishaji wa Ajili). Kuwezesha kompyuta kuelewa maandishi ili kuijibu maswali ya msingi bado ni lengo la NLP la changamoto. Tunawapendekeza modeli ya LSTM (BiLSTM) inayosoma sentensi mbili zilizotenganishwa na mpira wa kudhibiti hatia hiyo ni sahihi. We extend this model with a neural attention mechanism that encourages the model to make reasoning over the given claims and reasons.  Matokeo yaliyotolewa rasmi yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu umekuwa wa sita kati ya matamko 22 kwenye kazi hii.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را به کار ۱۲ در سال ۲۰۱۸ تحویل داده می\u200cکند (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). فعال کردن یک کامپیوتر برای درک یک متن تا بتواند جواب دهد سوالات درک هنوز هدف سختی NLP است. ما یک مدل LSTM (BiLSTM) دو مسیر پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که دو جمله را می\u200cخواند که با یک محدوده جدا شده است تا تعیین کند که چه حکم درست است. ما این مدل را با یک مکانیسم توجه عصبی تغییر می\u200cدهیم که مدل را تشویق می\u200cکند تا دلیل درباره\u200cی ادعا و دلیل\u200cهای داده\u200cشده\u200cاند بحث کند. نتایج رسمی آزاد شده نشان می دهد که سیستم ما در میان ۲۲ تسلیم این کار است.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf die stelsel wat na SemEval-2018 taak 12 ingestuur is (Die Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Aktiveer 'n rekenaar om 'n teks te verstaan sodat dit kan antwoord om verstaan vrae te verstaan is nog 'n pragtige doel van NLP. Ons voorstel 'n Bidireksionale LSTM (BiLSTM) model wat lees twee teikens geskei deur 'n delimiter om te bepaal watter woord korrek is. Ons uitbrei hierdie model met 'n neurale aandag mekanisme wat die model aanbevestig om rede te maak oor die gegewe aandrukkings en redes. Offisieel verligte resultate wys dat ons stelsel rank 6de onder 22 onderwerpe aan hierdie taak.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval-2018 G철revi 12'a g철nderilen sistemi tassy첵ar. Bir komp첵uteri metin d체힊체nmek 체챌in 첵azmak 체챌in bu 힊ekilde soraglary d체힊체nmek 체챌in bir komp첵uteri m체mkin edip bilsin. NLP-y흫 챌yky힊 maksady. Biz iki sany go첵beril첵채n LSTM (BiLSTM) nusgasyny bir delimiter bilen b철l체nen iki s철zleri oka첵an nusgasyny teklip ed첵채ris Biz bu nusgany berilen pikirler we seb채pleri barada d체힊체n체p ge챌irmek 체챌in nusgal 체ns체 mehanizmasy bilen uzatdyrys. Adat챌a sereden netijelerimiz sistemamyzy흫 bu zada 6-nji derej채 22-nji s체첵tge힊ik bolandygyny g철rkez첵채r.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለSemEval-2018 ስራ 12 የሚሰጡትን ስርዓት ይናገራል (የአርጉም አካል አካባቢ አድራሻ) ኮምፒውተር ጽሑፉን ለማስተዋል ማድረግ እንዲችል የጠቅላላ ጥያቄዎችን እንዲመልስ እንኳ የNLP ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ የBidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) model (BiLSTM) ማንኛውም ትክክለኛ እንዲሆን በተለየ ውይይት የተለየ ሁለት ቃላት ያነብባል፡፡ ይህንን ምሳሌ በናቡር የጥያቄ አካባቢ ማሰናከል እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ባለሥልጣን የተፈታው ውጤቶች የስርዓታችን ስርዓት በ22ኛው ክፍል ውስጥ 6ኛ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin e paraqitur në SemEval-2018 Task 12 (Task The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Aktivizimi i një kompjuteri për të kuptuar një tekst në mënyrë që ai të mund të përgjigjet pyetjeve të kuptimit është ende një qëllim sfidues i NLP. Ne propozojmë një model LSTM dy-drejtues (BiLSTM) që lexon dy fjalë të ndara nga një kufizues për të përcaktuar cili urdhër është i saktë. Ne e zgjerojmë këtë model me një mekanizëm vëmendjeje nervore që inkurajon modelin për të bërë arsyetim mbi pretendimet dhe arsyet e dhëna. Rezultatet e publikuara zyrtarisht tregojnë se sistemi ynë renditet i gjashti midis 22 paraqitjeve për këtë detyrë.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է համակարգը, որը ներկայացվել է "Halewal-2018"-ի 12-ի (Արվեստական պատճառի ընդհանուր հանձնարարությունը): Համակարգիչը տեքստի հասկանալու հնարավորությունը, որպեսզի նա կարողանա պատասխանել հասկանալու հարցերին, դեռևս հանդիսանում է ՆԼՊ-ի մարտահրավեր: Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու ուղղությամբ ԼՍԹՄ (ԲիԼՍԹՄ) մոդել, որը կարդում է երկու նախադասություն, առանձնացված սահմանափակով, որոշելու համար, թե որն է ճիշտ պատվիրանքը: Մենք ընդլայնում ենք այս մոդելը նյարդային ուշադրության մեխանիզմի միջոցով, որը խրախուսում է մոդելը մտածել տվյալ փաստարկների և պատճառների մասին: Արդյունքները, որոնք պաշտոնապես հրատարակվել են, ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր համակարգը 6-րդ դասակարգվում է այս խնդիրը կատարելու 22-ի մեջ:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১২ (আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরুদ্ধার করার কাজ) সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করেছে। একটি কম্পিউটার বোঝার জন্য কম্পিউটার সক্রিয় করে একটি টেক্সট বুঝতে পারে যাতে এটি সম্পূর্ণ প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিতে পারে এনএ আমরা একটি বাইডেডিয়াল এলস্টিএম (বিএলস্টিএম) মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যা একটি সীমিতার দ্বারা বিচ্ছিন্ন দ্বারা দুটি বাক্য পাঠ করে য আমরা এই মডেলটিকে নিউরেল মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে প্রসারিত করি যা মডেলের উৎসাহ প্রদান করে দাবি এবং কারণের বিষয়ে বিতর্ক করতে পারে। আনুষ্ঠানিকভাবে মুক্তি প্রদান করা ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সিস্টেম এই কাজের জন্য ২২ তমের মধ্যে ৬ তম সং', 'az': 'Bu kağıt SemEval-2018 Göndərilən Sistemi 12 (Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task) təsdiqləyir. Kompjuteri bir mətni anlamaq üçün fəallaşdırmaq üçün bu sualları anlamaq üçün hələ NLP üçün çətin bir məqsədi olaraq cavab verə bilər. Biz iki tərəfli LSTM (BiLSTM) modelini təbliğ edirik ki, hansı warrant ın doğruluğunu təsdiqləmək üçün bölünən iki cümləni oxuyar. Biz bu modeli nöral dikkati mehanizmilə genişləyirik ki, modeli verilən iddialar və səbəblər haqqında müzakirə etmək üçün səbəb edər. Göndərilən sonuçlar sistemimizin 22 dəfə istifadə edildiyini göstərir.', 'ca': "This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task).  Permitir que un ordinador entengui un text per poder respondre a preguntes de comprensió encara és un objectiu desafiant de la NLP. Proposem un model de LSTM bidireccional (BiLSTM) que llegeix dues frases separades per un delimitador per determinar quina orden és correct a. Estendem aquest model amb un mecanisme d'atenció neuronal que anima el model a fer raonament sobre les afirmacions i raons dadas. Els resultats publicats oficialment mostren que el nostre sistema es classe sexta entre 22 submissions a aquesta tasca.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut zadatku 12 za semiEval-2018 (zadatak za komprehenziju Argumenta). Uključujući kompjuter da razume tekst tako da može odgovoriti na pitanja razumijevanja još uvijek je izazovni cilj NLP-a. Predlažemo model LSTM (BiLSTM) koji čita dvije rečenice odvojene od delimiter a kako bi utvrdili koji je nalog ispravan. Proširimo ovaj model sa mehanizam neurološke pažnje koji poticava model da razgovara o određenim zahtjevima i razlicama. Zvanično objavljeni rezultati pokazuju da naš sistem čini 6. među 22 podataka ovom zadatku.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém předložený na SemEval-2018 Task 12 (The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task). Umožnit počítači porozumět textu tak, aby mohl odpovědět na otázky porozumění, je stále náročným cílem NLP. Navrhujeme obousměrný model LSTM (BiLSTM), který čte dvě věty oddělené odděleným oddělovačem, aby určil, který příkaz je správný. Tento model rozšiřujeme o neuronový mechanismus pozornosti, který podporuje model k uvažování o daných tvrzeních a důvodech. Oficiálně zveřejněné výsledky ukazují, že náš systém je šestý mezi 22 příspěvky k tomuto úkolu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse süsteemi, mis on esitatud SemEval-2018 ülesandele 12 (Argument Reasong Comprehension Task). Võimaldada arvutil tekstist aru saada, et ta saaks vastata arusaamise küsimustele, on endiselt NLP-i keeruline eesmärk. Pakume välja kahesuunalise LSTM (BiLSTM) mudeli, mis loeb kahte lauset eraldajaga, et teha kindlaks, milline garantii on õige. Laiendame seda mudelit närvilise tähelepanu mehhanismiga, mis julgustab mudelit arutlema antud väidete ja põhjuste üle. Ametlikult avaldatud tulemused näitavad, et meie süsteem on 22 esitatud ülesande hulgas 6. kohal.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval-2018 Task 12 (Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task) -tehtävään lähetetty järjestelmä. NLP:n haastava tavoite on, että tietokone pystyy ymmärtämään tekstiä niin, että se pystyy vastaamaan ymmärtämiskysymyksiin. Ehdotamme kaksisuuntaista LSTM-mallia (BiLSTM), joka lukee kaksi lausetta erottimella eroteltuna määrittääkseen, mikä takuu on oikea. Laajennamme tätä mallia neurohuomiomekanismilla, joka kannustaa mallia päättelemään annetut väitteet ja syyt. Virallisesti julkaistut tulokset osoittavat, että järjestelmämme sijoittuu 6. sijalle 22 tämän tehtävän julkaisusta.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje sistem, predložen v nalogo 12 SemEval-2018 (nalogo razumevanja argumentov). Omogočanje računalniku, da razume besedilo, tako da lahko odgovori na vprašanja razumevanja, je še vedno zahteven cilj NLP. Predlagamo dvosmerni model LSTM (BiLSTM), ki bere dva stavka, ločena z ločilnikom, da ugotovi, kateri nalog je pravilen. Ta model razširimo z nevronskim mehanizmom pozornosti, ki spodbuja model k razmišljanju o danih trditvah in razlogih. Uradno objavljeni rezultati kažejo, da se naš sistem uvršča na 6. mesto med 22 prispevki k tej nalogi.', 'ha': "Wannan takarda yana bayyana na'urar da aka saka shi zuwa aikin SimEV-2018 Kayan Aiki 12 (Tafiyar da Akwai Tafiyar da Ƙara na Mataimakin). Fara kwamfyuta don ya fahimta wani matsayi, dõmin ya iya karɓa wa tambayar jumla, yana da amfani da jigon NLP. Tuna goyyar da wani misali na LTRM (BiLStM) wanda ke karatun wata salon biyu da aka rarraba da wani mai ƙayyade zuwa ka ƙayyade cewa cewa wata inganci na gaske ne. Munã shimfiɗa wannan misalin da wani matsayin muhalli na aikin neura wanda ke kwaɗaitar misalin su yi jãyayya a kan daidai da saba'a da aka ba. Ana nuna matsalar da aka saka fara rasa, cewa zimanmu na danganta 6th daga saurãren zuwa wannan aikin.", 'he': 'המסמך הזה מתאר את המערכת שנשלחה למשימה 12 של SemEval-2018 (משימה הגיונית לטעון). האפשרות למחשב להבין טקסט כדי שיוכל לענות על שאלות הבנה היא עדיין מטרה מאתגרת של NLP. אנו מציעים מודל LSTM ביכיווני (BiLSTM) שקורא שני משפטים נפרדים על ידי מגבלת כדי לקבוע איזה צו נכון. אנו ממשיכים את המודל הזה עם מנגנון תשומת לב עצבית שמעודד את המודל לעשות הגיון על הטענות והסיבות הנתונות. התוצאות שפורסמות באופן רשמי מראות שהמערכת שלנו מגוונת ב-6 בין 22 התכניות למשימה הזאת.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki rambaran sistem sing ngewehke semebal-2008 task 12 Digawe komputer kanggo ngerasah teks dadi, bisa supoyo akeh comprisasi dipun ciptaaken dumateng, njuk tenang kelompok NLP. Awak dhéwé ngerasah model Bidirectiontal LTT (BiLTT M) Awak dhéwé éntuk model iki ngono perusahaan ingkang alam kuwi tindakan Neral sing bisa nguasai model kanggo ngono ngregani aturan tambah karo perusahaan Awak dhéwé éntuk punika dipoleh kanggo sistem dhéwé rangsané 6 ing 22 isuk nyelarane ning acara iki.', 'bo': 'ཤོག རྩིས་འཁོར་ཞིག་གིས་ཡི་གེ་རྟོགས་པར་ཡིག་གེ་རྟོགས་ནུས་ཡོད་པ We propose a Bidirectional LSTM (BiLSTM) model that reads two sentences separated by a delimiter to determine which warrant is correct. ང་ཚོས་མ་དབྱིབས་འདིར་སྐྱེན་གྱིས་དཔེ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྩིས་པ་འབྲེལ་གྱིས་བཏོན་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ན་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་གྲངས་སུ་༦་པ་ལ་གནད་སྡ'}
{'en': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : Generative Implication using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'ar': 'UniMelb في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: التضمين التوليدي باستخدام LSTMs والشبكات السيامية والتمثيلات الدلالية مع تشوش المرادفات', 'es': 'UniMelb en SemEval-2018 Tarea 12: Implicación generativa mediante LSTM, redes siamesas y representaciones semánticas con fusión de sinónimos', 'fr': "UniMelb à SemEval-2018 Task 12\xa0: Implication générative à l'aide de LSTM, de réseaux siamois et de représentations sémantiques avec fuzzing de synonymes", 'pt': 'UniMelb no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: Implicação Gerativa usando LSTMs, Redes Siamesas e Representações Semânticas com Sinônimos Fuzzing', 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のUniMelbタスク12 ： LSTM、Siamese Networks、および同義語Fuzzingを持つセマンティック表現を使用した生成的暗示', 'ru': 'UniMelb на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Генеративное влияние с использованием LSTM, сиамских сетей и семантических представлений с синонимом Fuzzing', 'zh': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 事 12:用 LSTM、Siamese Networks 、 Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing 之义', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 कार्य 12 पर UniMelb: LSTMs, Siamese नेटवर्क और समानार्थक शब्द Fuzzing के साथ शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग कर उत्पादक निहितार्थ', 'ga': 'UniMelb ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: Impleacht Ghiniteach ag baint úsáide as LSTManna, Líonraí Siamese agus Léirithe Séimeantacha le Comhchiall Fuzzing', 'el': 'Καθήκον 12: Γενετική Ενσωμάτωση με χρήση Σιαμιακών Δικτύων και Σημματικών Αντιπροσωπειών με Συνώνυμο Φουζ', 'ka': 'UniMelb პარამეტრებში SemEval-2018 პარამეტრებში 12: სენონიმური იმპლექცია გამოყენებული LSTMs, Siamese ქსელები და Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'kk': 'UniMelb 12- тапсырманың semiEval- 2018 тапсырмасы: LSTMs, Siamese желі және Semantic Representations with synonym Fuzzing', 'lt': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Generative Implication using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'mk': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Generative Implication using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'ms': 'UniMelb pada SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Implikasi Generatif menggunakan LSTMs, Rangkaian Siamese dan Perwakilan Semantik dengan Pencampuran Sinonim', 'it': 'UniMelb al SemEval-2018 Task 12: Implicazione Generativa utilizzando LSTMs, Reti Siamese e Rappresentazioni Semantiche con Synonym Fuzzing', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12: LSTMs, സിയാമിസ് നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകളും സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധികളും സിനോനിമിനി ഫുസ്സില്\u200d', 'mt': 'UniMelb f’SemEval-2018 Kompitu 12: Implikazzjoni Ġenerattiva bl-użu ta’ LSTMs, Netwerks Siamiċi u Rappreżentazzjonijiet Semantiċi b’Fużjoni Sinonika', 'mn': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Generative Implementation using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'hu': 'UniMelb a SemEval-2018 12. feladaton: generációs implikáció LSTMs, sziámi hálózatok és szemantikus reprezentációk segítségével', 'pl': 'UniMelb w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Implikacja generacyjna przy użyciu LSTMów, sieci syjamskich i reprezentacji semantycznych z synonimem Fuzzing', 'ro': 'UniMelb la SemEval-2018 Task 12: Implicații generative folosind LSTMs, rețele siameze și reprezentări semantice cu fuzzing sinonim', 'sr': 'UniMelb na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: Generalna implementacija koristeći LSTMs, Siamejske mreže i semantičke predstave sa sinonim fuzzing', 'so': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Generative Implication using LSTMs, Siamese Network and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'no': 'UniMelb ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 12: Generert implementering ved bruk av LSTMs, Siamese nettverk og semantiske representasjonar med synonym fuzzing', 'sv': 'UniMelb på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: Generativ Implikation med hjälp av LSTMs, siamesiska nätverk och semantiska representationer med Synonym Fuzzing', 'si': 'UniMelb at semeval-2018 Job 12: General Use LSTMs, Siamese Netwarks and semantic presents with Synonicm Fuzzing', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணி 12: LSTMs, Siamese Network and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: LSTMs, Siamese Networks اور Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'UniMelb tại SemEvl-thẩm 8 Task 12: implication phát tác bằng LSTMs, Siamese Networks và Semantics Representation with Synonym Fuzzing', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Генеративна импликация с помощта на ЛСТМ, сиамски мрежи и семантични представителства със синоним Фузинг', 'hr': 'UniMelb na zadatku 12: Generalna implementacija koristeći LSTMs, Siamese mreže i semantičke predstave s sinonim fuzzing', 'da': 'UniMelb ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Generativ Implikation ved hjælp af LSTMs, siamesiske netværk og semantiske repræsentationer med Synonym Fuzzing', 'nl': 'UniMelb bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Generatieve Implicatie met LSTMs, Siamese Netwerken en Semantische Representaties met synoniem Fuzzing', 'id': 'UniMelb di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Implikasi Generatif menggunakan LSTM, Jaringan Siama dan Representasi Semantik dengan Sinonym Fuzzing', 'ko': 'Sem Eval-18 작업 12: LSTM, 샴페인 네트워크와 동의어를 사용하여 모호한 의미를 나타내는 생성 의미', 'de': 'UniMelb bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 12: Generative Implikation mit LSTMs, Siamesischen Netzwerken und Semantischen Repräsentationen mit Synonym Fuzzing', 'sw': 'UniMelb katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Mgogoro wa Kizalendo kwa kutumia LSTMs, Mtandao wa Siamese na Wawakilishi wa Semantic with Synonym', 'af': 'UniMelb by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 12: Genereerde Implikasie gebruik LSTMs, Siamese Netwerke en Semantiese voorstellings met sinoniem Fuzzing', 'am': '12: Generative Implication using LSTMs, Siamese Network and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'fa': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Implementation Generative using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'sq': 'UniMelb në SemEval-2018 Task 12: Implication gjenerative using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ইউনিমেলব ১২: এলস্টিএমএস, সিয়াম নেটওয়ার্ক এবং সিম্যান্ডিক প্রতিনিধি সিনোমিম ফ্যাজিং এর সাথে প্রজন্মিত এক', 'hy': 'Unimelb-ը 2018 թվականի "Սեմենտիվ" 12 նպատակում. Գեներատիվ ներկայացում LSMT-ների, Սիամական ցանցերի և Սեմանտիկ ներկայացումների միջոցով', 'tr': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Generative Implication using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'cs': 'UniMelb na SemEval-2018 Úkol 12: Generační implikace pomocí LSTMs, siamských sítí a sémantických reprezentací se synonymem Fuzzing', 'et': 'UniMelb SemEval-2018 ülesandel 12: generatiivsed tagajärjed LSTMde, siaami võrgustike ja semantiliste esinduste kasutamisel koos sünonüümiga Fuzzing', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: LSTMs, Siamese Networks və Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'bs': 'UniMelb na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: generativna implementacija koristeći LSTMs, Siamese mreže i semantičke predstave sa sinonim fuzzing', 'ca': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Generative Implication using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'fi': 'UniMelb SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: Generatiivinen implikaatio LSTMs, siamilaiset verkot ja semanttiset edustukset Synonyymi Fuzzing', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Generative Implication using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing', 'jv': 'UniMelb at semi-inval-2008 task 12: Generative Installation Using LTT mrs, Siamse networks and semanti representations with sinanym Fzzang', 'sk': 'UniMelb na SemEval-2018 naloga 12: Generativna implikacija z uporabo LSTMs, siamskih omrežij in semantičnih predstavitev s sinonimom Fuzzing', 'he': 'UniMelb ב SemEval-2018 Task 12: Generative Implication using LSTMs, Siamese Networks and Semantic Representations with Synonym Fuzzing'}
{'en': 'This paper describes a warrant classification system for SemEval 2018 Task 12, that attempts to learn semantic representations of reasons, claims and warrants. The system consists of 3 stacked LSTMs : one for the reason, one for the claim, and one shared Siamese Network for the 2 candidate warrants. Our main contribution is to force the embeddings into a shared feature space using vector operations, semantic similarity classification, Siamese networks, and multi-task learning. In doing so, we learn a form of generative implication, in encoding implication interrelationships between reasons, claims, and the associated correct and incorrect warrants. We augment the limited data in the task further by utilizing WordNet synonym fuzzing. When applied to SemEval 2018 Task 12, our system performs well on the development data, and officially ranked 8th among 21 teams.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام تصنيف أمر لـ SemEval 2018 Task 12 ، الذي يحاول معرفة التمثيلات الدلالية للأسباب والمطالبات والضمانات. يتكون النظام من 3 نماذج LSTM مكدسة: واحدة للسبب ، وواحدة للمطالبة ، وشبكة سيامية مشتركة للأمرين المرشحين. تتمثل مساهمتنا الرئيسية في إجبار الزخارف على مساحة ميزة مشتركة باستخدام عمليات المتجهات ، وتصنيف التشابه الدلالي ، والشبكات السيامية ، والتعلم متعدد المهام. من خلال القيام بذلك ، نتعلم شكلاً من أشكال التضمين التوليدي ، في ترميز العلاقات المتبادلة الضمنية بين الأسباب والادعاءات والضمانات الصحيحة وغير الصحيحة المرتبطة بها. نقوم بزيادة البيانات المحدودة في المهمة بشكل أكبر من خلال استخدام مرادف WordNet "التشويش". عند تطبيقه على SemEval 2018 Task 12 ، يعمل نظامنا جيدًا على بيانات التطوير ، ويحتل المرتبة الثامنة رسميًا بين 21 فريقًا.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve um sistema de classificação de garantias para a Tarefa 12 do SemEval 2018, que tenta aprender representações semânticas de razões, reivindicações e garantias. O sistema consiste em 3 LSTMs empilhados: um para o motivo, um para a reclamação e uma Rede Siamese compartilhada para os 2 mandados candidatos. Nossa principal contribuição é forçar os embeddings em um espaço de características compartilhado usando operações vetoriais, classificação de similaridade semântica, redes siamesas e aprendizado multitarefa. Ao fazer isso, aprendemos uma forma de implicação generativa, na codificação de inter-relações de implicação entre razões, reivindicações e as garantias corretas e incorretas associadas. Aumentamos ainda mais os dados limitados na tarefa utilizando o sinônimo WordNet “fuzzing”. Quando aplicado à Tarefa 12 do SemEval 2018, nosso sistema tem um bom desempenho nos dados de desenvolvimento e ficou oficialmente em 8º lugar entre 21 equipes.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit un système de classification des mandats pour SemEval 2018 Task 12, qui tente d'apprendre les représentations sémantiques des motifs, des réclamations et des mandats. Le système se compose de 3 LSTM empilés\xa0: un pour la raison, un pour la réclamation, et un réseau Siamois partagé pour les 2 mandats candidats. Notre principale contribution est de forcer les intégrations dans un espace d'entités partagé à l'aide d'opérations vectorielles, de classification de similarité sémantique, de réseaux siamois et d'apprentissage multitâche. Ce faisant, nous apprenons une forme d'implication générative, en codant les relations d'implication entre les raisons, les réclamations et les bons et incorrects associés. Nous augmentons encore les données limitées de la tâche en utilisant le synonyme WordNet «\xa0fuzzing\xa0». Appliqué à la tâche 12 de SemEval 2018, notre système fonctionne bien sur les données de développement et s'est officiellement classé 8e parmi 21 équipes.", 'es': 'Este documento describe un sistema de clasificación de garantías para la Tarea 12 de SemEval 2018, que intenta aprender representaciones semánticas de motivos, reclamos y garantías. El sistema consta de 3 LSTM apilados: uno para el motivo, otro para la reclamación y una red siamesa compartida para las 2 órdenes de los candidatos. Nuestra principal contribución es forzar la integración en un espacio de características compartido mediante operaciones vectoriales, clasificación de similitud semántica, redes siamesas y aprendizaje multitarea. Al hacerlo, aprendemos una forma de implicación generativa, al codificar las interrelaciones de implicación entre motivos, reclamos y las garantías correctas e incorrectas asociadas. Aumentamos aún más los datos limitados de la tarea utilizando el sinónimo de WordNet «fuzzing». Cuando se aplica a la Tarea 12 de SemEval 2018, nuestro sistema funciona bien en los datos de desarrollo y oficialmente ocupó el octavo lugar entre 21 equipos.', 'ja': '本稿では、理由、主張、およびワラントの意味的表現を学習しようとするSemEval 2018タスク12のワラント分類システムについて説明する。システムは、3つの積み重ねられたLSTMで構成されています。1つは理由、1つはクレーム、そして2つの候補ワラントのために共有されたSiamese Networkです。私たちの主な貢献は、ベクトル演算、セマンティック類似性分類、Siameseネットワーク、マルチタスク学習を使用して、埋め込みを共有特徴空間に強制することです。そうすることで、私たちは、理由、請求項、および関連する正解および不正確なワラント間の暗示的相互関係をエンコードすることにおける、生成的暗示の一形態を学びます。WordNetの代名詞「ファジング」を活用して、タスク内の限られたデータをさらに拡張します。SemEval 2018タスク12に適用すると、当社のシステムは開発データで優れたパフォーマンスを発揮し、公式には21チーム中8位にランクインしました。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval 2018 Task 12权证之统,当统试图学,声明权证之语义。 其统由3堆叠之LSTM:一以用索赔,一以共暹罗网络以2候选权证。 凡贡用向量运算,语义相似性分类,Siamese网络与多任务学嵌共空中。 学蕴涵之文,编码其所以然,正非其蕴涵。 吾以WordNet同义词模糊测试,益增其有限数据。 当用于SemEval 2018 Task 12时,系统于开发数据,并排名第8位于21团队中。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2018 टास्क 12 के लिए एक वारंट वर्गीकरण प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है, जो कारणों, दावों और वारंटों के शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने का प्रयास करता है। सिस्टम में 3 स्टैक्ड एलएसटीएम होते हैं: एक कारण के लिए, एक दावे के लिए, और 2 उम्मीदवार वारंट के लिए एक साझा सियामी नेटवर्क। हमारा मुख्य योगदान वेक्टर संचालन, शब्दार्थ समानता वर्गीकरण, सियामी नेटवर्क और बहु-कार्य सीखने का उपयोग करके एक साझा सुविधा स्थान में एम्बेडिंग को मजबूर करना है। ऐसा करने में, हम कारणों, दावों और संबंधित सही और गलत वारंट के बीच निहितार्थ अंतर्संबंधों को एन्कोडिंग करने में, उत्पादक निहितार्थ का एक रूप सीखते हैं। हम WordNet पर्यायवाची शब्द "fuzzing" का उपयोग करके कार्य में सीमित डेटा को और अधिक बढ़ाते हैं। जब SemEval 2018 टास्क 12 पर लागू किया जाता है, तो हमारी प्रणाली विकास डेटा पर अच्छा प्रदर्शन करती है, और आधिकारिक तौर पर 21 टीमों के बीच 8 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система классификации ордеров для задачи 12 SemEval 2018, которая пытается изучить семантические представления причин, утверждений и ордеров. Система состоит из 3 суммированных LSTM: один по причине, один по заявке и одна общая сиамская сеть для 2 ордеров-кандидатов. Наш основной вклад состоит в том, чтобы заставить вложения в общее пространство признаков с помощью векторных операций, семантической классификации сходства, сиамских сетей и многозадачного обучения. При этом мы изучаем форму генеративного подтекста, кодируя имплицитные взаимосвязи между причинами, претензиями и соответствующими правильными и неправильными ордерами. Мы увеличиваем ограниченность данных в задаче, используя синоним WordNet “flozzing”. При применении к Задаче 12 SemEval 2018 наша система хорошо справляется с данными разработки и официально заняла 8-е место среди 21 команды.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chóras aicmithe barántais le haghaidh Tasc 12 SemEval 2018, a dhéanann iarracht léirithe shéimeantacha ar chúiseanna, éilimh agus barántais a fhoghlaim. Tá an córas comhdhéanta de 3 LSTM cruachta: ceann amháin don chúis, ceann amháin don éileamh, agus Líonra Siamese roinnte amháin don 2 bharántas iarrthóra. Is é an príomh-rannchuidiú atá againn ná na neaduithe a bhrú isteach i spás gné roinnte ag baint úsáide as oibríochtaí veicteora, aicmiú cosúlachta shéimeantach, líonraí Siamese, agus foghlaim ilthasc. Agus é sin á dhéanamh againn, foghlaimímid cineál impleachta giniúna, agus ionchódú á dhéanamh ar an idirghaolmhaireachtaí idir cúiseanna, éilimh, agus na barántais chearta agus mhíchearta a ghabhann leo. Cuirimid leis na sonraí teoranta sa tasc trí úsáid a bhaint as comhchiall WordNet “fuzzing”. Nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm é ar Thasc 12 SemEval 2018, feidhmíonn ár gcóras go maith ar na sonraí forbartha, agus tá sé rangaithe go hoifigiúil san 8ú háit i measc 21 fhoireann.', 'ka': "ამ დოკუმენტის შეტყობინება SemEval 2018 დავალებისთვის კლასიფიკაციის სისტემა 12, რომელიც მოცდილობს სენმანტიკური გამოსახულებების, წარმოდგენების და დასახულებების შესახებ. სისტემის შეფარდება 3 LSTMs: ერთი მიზეზით, ერთი მიზეზით, ერთი მიზეზით და ერთი საზოგადო სიამის ქსელი ორი კანდიდენტების მიზეზით. ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი დამატება არის გავამუშავოთ გარეშე განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციების გარეშე გვქტორის პერაციების გამოყენებაში, სემონტიკური განსხვავება კლასიფიკაცია, სიამიზების ქ ამას ვაკეთებთ, ჩვენ ვისწავლით გენერაციური იმპლიფიკაციის ფორმა, კოდიფიკაციის იმპლიფიკაციის კოდიფიკაციის შესახებ მიზეზების, წესების და შესახებ დაკავშირებული მა ჩვენ დავზრდებით უფრო დავზრდებით მონაცემები სამუშაოში WordNet სინონიმის გამოყენებით 'fuzzing'. როდესაც SemEval 2018 დავაკეთებული 12 დავაკეთებაში, ჩვენი სისტემა ძალიან გავაკეთება განვითარების მონაცემებზე, და უფლებად 21 ჯგუფი შორის 8-ი დავაკეთება.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2018 Task 12 parancssorosztályozási rendszerét, amely megpróbálja megismerni az indokok, igények és garanciák szemantikai ábrázolását. A rendszer 3 halmozott LSTMből áll: egy okból, egy követelésből, és egy megosztott Sziámi Hálózatból a két jelölt parancs esetében. Fő hozzájárulásunk az, hogy a beágyazásokat egy megosztott funkciótérbe erőltessük vektorműveletekkel, szemantikai hasonlósági osztályozással, sziámi hálózatokkal és többfeladatos tanulással. Ennek során megismerjük a generációs következményeket, amelyek kódolják az indokok, igények és a kapcsolódó helyes és helytelen garanciák közötti kölcsönös összefüggéseket. A feladat korlátozott adatait tovább bővítjük a WordNet "fuzzing" szinonimával. A SemEval 2018 Task 12-re alkalmazva rendszerünk jól teljesít a fejlesztési adatok tekintetében, és hivatalosan a 8. helyen áll a 21 csapat közül.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive un sistema di classificazione dei mandati per SemEval 2018 Task 12, che tenta di apprendere rappresentazioni semantiche di ragioni, rivendicazioni e garanzie. Il sistema è composto da 3 LSTM impilati: uno per il motivo, uno per il claim, e uno condiviso Siamese Network per i 2 mandati candidati. Il nostro contributo principale è quello di forzare le incorporazioni in uno spazio di funzionalità condiviso utilizzando operazioni vettoriali, classificazione semantica della somiglianza, reti siamese e apprendimento multi-task. In questo modo, apprendiamo una forma di implicazione generativa, nella codifica delle interrelazioni di implicazione tra ragioni, rivendicazioni e le garanzie corrette e errate associate. Aumentiamo ulteriormente i dati limitati nell'attività utilizzando WordNet sinonimo 'fuzzing'. Quando applicato a SemEval 2018 Task 12, il nostro sistema funziona bene sui dati di sviluppo e si classifica ufficialmente ottavo tra 21 team.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama 2018 m. SemEval 12 užduoties įsakymų klasifikavimo sistema, kuria siekiama mokytis semantinio motyvų, reikalavimų ir įsakymų pateikimo. Sistemą sudaro trys surinkti LSTM: vienas dėl priežasties, vienas dėl pretenzijos ir vienas bendras Siamo tinklas dėl dviejų kandidatų užsakymų. Mūsų pagrindinis indėlis yra priversti įtraukimą į bendrą savybių erdvę naudojant vektorių operacijas, semantinę panašumo klasifikaciją, Siamo tinklus ir daugiafunkcinį mokymąsi. Tokiu būdu mes sužinome, kokios kartos daro įtaką koduojant priežasčių, reikalavimų ir susijusių teisingų ir neteisingų orderių tarpusavio ryšius. Mes dar labiau padidiname ribotus duomenis užduotyje naudojant WordNet sinonimą "fuzzing". When applied to SemEval 2018 Task 12, our system performs well on the development data, and officially ranked 8th among 21 teams.', 'ms': "This paper describes a warrant classification system for SemEval 2018 Task 12, that attempts to learn semantic representations of reasons, claims and warrants.  Sistem ini terdiri dari 3 LSTM tumpukan: satu untuk alasan, satu untuk tuntutan, dan satu Jaringan Siama berkongsi untuk 2 waran calon. Kontribusi utama kami ialah memaksa penyampaian ke ruang ciri-ciri terkongsi menggunakan operasi vektor, klasifikasi persamaan semantik, rangkaian Siama, dan pembelajaran multi-tugas. Dalam melakukan itu, kita belajar bentuk implikasi generatif, dalam pengekodan implikasi hubungan antara sebab, klaim, dan waran yang terkait betul dan salah. Kami tambahkan data terbatas dalam tugas lebih lanjut dengan menggunakan sinonim WordNet 'fuzzing'. Apabila dilaksanakan untuk SemEval 2018 Task 12, sistem kami berjalan dengan baik pada data pembangunan, dan secara rasmi ditandai ke-8 di antara 21 pasukan.", 'kk': "Бұл қағаз 2018 жылдық 12- тапсырма үшін бағаттау жүйесін таңдайды. Бұл себептердің, сұрақтардың және бағаттауларының семантикалық түсініктерін үйрену әрекетін көрсетеді. Бұл жүйе 3 қалған LSTMs болады: бірінің себебі, бірінің сұрақтығы, бірінің 2 кандидаттардың ортақтастырылған Siamese желі. Негізгі қатынасыз - вектор операцияларын, semantic similarity классификациясын, сиамез желілерін және көп тапсырмаларды оқыту арқылы ортақ қасиеттеріне ендіру. Бұл істеу үшін, біз кодтамасының себептері, жағдайлардың арасындағы арасындағы қатынастар мен қатынастырылған дұрыс және дұрыс жағдайлардың түрін үйренеміз. Біз WordNet синонимін 'fuzzing' дегенді қолдануға арналған тапсырманың шектелген деректерін тапсырмасына көтеріп қою. 2018 жылдың SemEval 12 тапсырмасына қолданылса, жүйеміз жасау деректеріне жақсы жұмыс істейді, әдетте 21 топтардың 8-ші ретінде орындалады.", 'mk': 'Овој весник опишува систем за класификација на налоги за SemEval 2018 задача 12, кој се обидува да научи семантични претставувања на причините, барањата и налогите. Системот се состои од 3 купи ЛСТМ: една од причината, една од барањето, и една заедничка Сијамска мрежа за двата налоги за кандидати. Our main contribution is to force the embeddings into a shared feature space using vector operations, semantic similarity classification, Siamese networks, and multi-task learning.  Со тоа научивме форма на генерационална импликација, во кодирањето на импликациите меѓу причините, тврдењата и поврзаните коректни и неправилни налоги. Ги зголемуваме ограничените податоци во задачата понатаму со користење на WordNet синонимот „ fuzzing “. Кога се примени на SemEval 2018 задача 12, нашиот систем успева добро на податоците за развој, и официјално се рангираше на осмиот меѓу 21 тим.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12-നുള്ള വാറന്\u200dറ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു. കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d, ആവശ്യങ്ങളും വാറന്\u200dറുകളും  The system consists of 3 stacked LSTMs: one for the reason, one for the claim, and one shared Siamese Network for the 2 candidate warrants.  ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പങ്കിട്ടുള്ള പ്രത്യേക സ്ഥലത്തേക്ക് പ്രവേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്, സെമാന് അങ്ങനെ ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ജനററിയല്\u200d പ്രശ്നം പഠിക്കുന്നു, കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d, ഉത്തരവാദികള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കോഡിങ്ങ് ചെയ് വാര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റ് സിനോനിമം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12 പ്രയോഗിച്ചപ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം ചെയ്യുന', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi sistema ta’ klassifikazzjoni tal-mandat għal SemEval 2018 Task 12, li tipprova titgħallem rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi ta’ raġunijiet, talbiet u mandati. Is-sistema tikkonsisti fi tliet LSTMs stacked: waħda għar-raġuni, waħda għat-talba, u Netwerk Siamese wieħed kondiviż għaż-żewġ mandati kandidati. Il-kontribut ewlieni tagħna huwa li nġiebu l-inkorporazzjonijiet fi spazju ta’ karatteristiċi komuni bl-użu ta’ operazzjonijiet ta’ vetturi, klassifikazzjoni semantika ta’ similarità, netwerks Siami, u tagħlim multikompiti. Meta nagħmlu dan, nitgħallmu form a ta’ implikazzjoni ġenerattiva, fl-ikkodifikar ta’ interrelazzjonijiet ta’ implikazzjoni bejn ir-raġunijiet, it-talbiet, u l-mandati korretti u inkorretti assoċjati. Aħna nżidu aktar id-dejta limitata fil-kompitu billi nużaw is-sinonimu WordNet 'fuzzing'. Meta applikata għal SemEval 2018 Task 12, is-sistema tagħna tagħna tagħmel tajjeb fuq id-dejta tal-iżvilupp, u uffiċjalment ikklassifikat it-tmien fost 21 tim.", 'pl': 'W artykule opisano system klasyfikacji warrantów dla SemEval 2018 Task 12, który próbuje nauczyć się semantycznych reprezentacji przyczyn, roszczeń i warrantów. System składa się z trzech układanych LSTMów: jednego z powodu, jednego dla roszczenia i jednego wspólnego Siamse Network dla dwóch nakazów kandydatów. Naszym głównym wkładem jest wymuszenie osadzeń we wspólnej przestrzeni funkcji za pomocą operacji wektorowych, klasyfikacji semantycznych podobieństw, sieci syjamskich i wielozadaniowego uczenia się. W ten sposób uczymy się formy implikacji generacyjnej, w zakodowaniu wzajemnych relacji implikacyjnych między przyczynami, roszczeniami i związanymi z nimi poprawnymi i nieprawidłowymi gwarancjami. Ograniczone dane w zadaniu dodatkowo rozszerzamy, używając synonimu WordNet "fuzzing". W przypadku zastosowania do SemEval 2018 Task 12 nasz system sprawdza się dobrze na danych rozwojowych, a oficjalnie zajął się ósmym miejscem wśród 21 zespołów.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver eit ordklassifikasjonssystem for semiEval 2018 oppgåve 12, som prøver å lære semantiske representasjonar av grunner, tvaringar og ordenar. Systemet inneheld av 3 plasserte LSTMs: ein for grunnen, ein for tiltak, og ein delt Siamese- nettverk for dei to kandidatordene. Vårt hovudbidrag er å tvinge innbyggingane til eit delt funksjonsplass ved å bruka vektoroperasjonar, semantisk liknande klassifikasjon, syamesisk nettverk og fleire oppgåver. I å gjøre det, lærer vi ein form av generelt implikasjon, i kodingsimplikasjonsbehandlingar mellom grunnar, tiltak og tilknytte korrekte og feil ordenar. Vi aukar begrensede data i oppgåva lenger ved å bruka WordNet synonym « fuzzing ». Når det er tilgjengeleg for semiEval 2018 oppgåve 12, utviklingsdata utfører vårt godt, og offisielt rangert 8. mellom 21 grupper.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie un sistem de clasificare a mandatelor pentru SemEval 2018 Task 12, care încearcă să învețe reprezentări semantice ale motivelor, pretențiilor și garanțiilor. Sistemul este format din 3 LSTMs stivuite: unul pentru motiv, unul pentru pretenție și unul comun Siamez Network pentru cele 2 mandate candidate. Contribuția noastră principală este de a forța încorporările într-un spațiu de caracteristici partajat folosind operațiuni vectoriale, clasificarea similarității semantice, rețele siameze și învățarea multi-task. Făcând acest lucru, învățăm o formă de implicare generativă, în codificarea interrelațiilor implicate între motive, pretenții și mandatele corecte și incorecte asociate. Îmbunătățim datele limitate din sarcină utilizând sinonimul WordNet "fuzzing". Atunci când este aplicat la SemEval 2018 Task 12, sistemul nostru performează bine pe datele de dezvoltare și se clasează oficial pe locul 8 în rândul a 21 de echipe.', 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වෙල් 2018 වැඩ 12 වෙනුවෙන් වාර්න්ට් විශේෂණ පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා, ඒකෙන් හේතුව, ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ වාර්න පද්ධතියේ තියෙන්නේ LSTMs 3ක්: හේතුවෙන් එකක්, කිරීම සඳහා එකක්, සියාමිස් ජාලයෙන් එකක්, කිරීමිත දෙකක් සඳහා සියාමි අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන සම්බන්ධයක් තමයි වෙක්ටර් ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය, සෙමැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධතාවක් විශේෂණය, සියාම් ජාලය, සහ ගොඩක් වැඩි එහෙම කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරභාවිත සම්බන්ධයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා, සම්බන්ධතාවන්, සම්බන්ධතාවන්, සම්බන්ධතාවන් සහ වැරැද්ධතාවන්  අපි කාර්යයෙන් සීමාවිත දත්ත වැඩි කරනවා WordNet සමානම් විදිහට 'ෆුස්සිංග්' භාවිත කරන්න. සෙම්වෙල් 2018 කාර්ය 12 වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය දත්ත ගැන හොඳයි, සහ ප්\u200dරධානිකයෙන් කණ්ඩායම් 21 අතර 8", 'sr': "Ovaj papir opisuje sistem klasifikacije naloga za 12. zadatak za pola Evala 2018, koji pokušava da nauči semantičke predstave razloga, zahteva i naloga. Sistem se sastoji od 3 postavljene LSTMs: jedna iz razloga, jedna za zahtev, i jedna zajednička Siamejska mreža za dva kandidatska naloga. Naš glavni doprinos je prisiliti integraciju u zajednički prostor koristeći vektorske operacije, semantičku klasifikaciju sličnosti, Siamejske mreže i učenje više zadataka. Tako smo naučili formu generične implikacije, u kodiranju implikacijskih odnosa između razloga, tvrdnji i povezanih ispravnih i nepravnih naloga. Povećavamo ograničene podatke u zadatku dalje koristeći WordNet sinonim 'fuzzing'. Kada se primjenjuje na 12. zadatak za semiEval 2018, naš sistem dobro obavlja podatke o razvoju, i zvanično je postao 8. među 21 tima.", 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa lagu qoraa nidaamka fasaxda looga baaraandegayo SemEval 2018 shaqo 12, kaas oo isku dayaya in aad barto noocyada qeybta ah sababaha, dalbashada iyo ogolaanshaha. nidaamka waxaa ka mid ah 3 xafiiska LSTMs: mid sababta darteed, mid sababta darteed, mid waxaa lagu qeybiyay shabakadda Siamese ee ogolaanshiyaha labada kandidada ah. Kharashadaada ugu horeeya waa in lagu qasbo meelaha la qaybsado oo lagu isticmaalo howlaha vector, fasaxa isku mid ah, shabakado Siamese iyo waxbarashada shaqo badan. Markaas waxaynu barnaa qaab muuqasho ah oo dhaqdhaqaaq ah, oo ku qoraya xiriirka la xiriira sababaha, dalabka iyo sharciga la xiriira saxda iyo sharciga saxda ah. Waxaynu ku dareynaa macluumaadka xadda ah ee shaqada si dheeraad ah ugu isticmaalnaa isticmaalka "fuzzing" WordNet. Markii lagu codsaday Shaqada 12 ee SemEval 2018, nidaamkayagu wuxuu si wanaagsan u sameeyaa macluumaadka horumarinta, wuxuuna si rasmi ah u kala baxay kooxda 21.', 'ta': "இந்த தாள் செம்Eval 2018 பணி 12 க்கு ஒரு வார்ட் வகைப்பு அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறது, காரணங்கள், கூறுதல் மற்றும் வாக்குறுதிகள் காரணங்கள் மற்று முறைமையில் 3 ஒட்டப்பட்ட LSTMs கொண்டுள்ளது: காரணத்திற்காக ஒன்று, ஒரு கூறுதலுக்கு, மற்றும் ஒரு பகிர்ந்த Siamese பிணையத்தில் இருந் எங்கள் முக்கிய பங்குகள் பங்கிடப்பட்ட பண்புக்குறிப்பு இடைவெளி செயல்களை பயன்படுத்தி, பாதிப்பு ஒற்றை வகைப்பு, அளவு பிணைப்புகள், மற்றும் பல பணி கற இதைச் செய்யும் போது, நாம் ஒரு பொதுவான குறிப்பிட்ட தொடர்புகளை கற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம், காரணங்கள், கூறுகள் மற்றும் இணைப்பு சரியா நாம் செயலில் உள்ள வரம்பு தகவல்களை மேலும் சேர்க்க வேர்ட்நெட்டின் ஒத்திசைவை பயன்படுத்தி 'பிழைத்திடுகிறது SemEval 2018 பணி 12 க்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει ένα σύστημα ταξινόμησης εντάλματος για την εργασία που επιχειρεί να μάθει σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις λόγων, αξιώσεων και εντάλματων. Το σύστημα αποτελείται από τρία στοιβαγμένα LSTMs: ένα για τον λόγο, ένα για την αξίωση, και ένα κοινό Σιαμέζικο Δίκτυο για τα δύο υποψήφια εντάλματα. Η κύρια συμβολή μας είναι να εξαναγκάσουμε την ενσωμάτωση σε έναν κοινόχρηστο χώρο χαρακτηριστικών χρησιμοποιώντας διανυσματικές λειτουργίες, ταξινόμηση σημασιολογικής ομοιότητας, σιαμικά δίκτυα και εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, μαθαίνουμε μια μορφή γενεαλογικής υπαγωγής, στην κωδικοποίηση συσχετισμών συνεπειών μεταξύ λόγων, αξιώσεων, και των σχετικών σωστών και εσφαλμένων εγγυήσεων. Αυξάνουμε τα περιορισμένα δεδομένα στην εργασία περαιτέρω χρησιμοποιώντας το συνώνυμο του WordNet "fuzzing". Όταν εφαρμόζεται στην εργασία 12, το σύστημά μας αποδίδει καλά στα δεδομένα ανάπτυξης και κατατάσσεται επίσημα 8η μεταξύ 21 ομάδων.', 'ur': "اس کاغذ نے SemEval 2018 ٹاکس 12 کے لئے واورنٹ کلاسیفون سیسٹم کی تعریف کی ہے، جو دلیل، فریاد اور واورنٹوں کی سیکھنے کی کوشش کرتا ہے. سیسٹم میں تین استکڑے LSTMs کا سامان ہے: ایک دلیل ہے، ایک دلیل ہے، ایک دلیل ہے، اور ایک مشترک سیامیز نیٹ ورک ہے دو کاندینٹ وارینٹ کے لئے۔ ہمارا اصلی حصہ یہ ہے کہ ابڈینگ کو ایک مشترک فائدہ جگہ میں مجبور کریں، ویکتور عملیات کے مطابق، سیمانٹی سیمانٹی کلاسیفوں، سیامی نیٹ ورک، اور بہت سی ٹاکس سیکھنے کے مطابق۔ ایسا کرنا، ہم نے ایک جوانٹ کی تعلق سکھایا ہے، اسکوندیونٹ کی تعلق کی تعلق، دلیلوں اور مشترک درست اور غلط حکومت کے درمیان. ہم دنیا میں محدودہ ڈیٹا اضافہ کرتے ہیں WordNet synonym 'fuzzing' کے مطابق۔ جبکہ سمیوئل 2018 ٹاکس 12 پر استعمال کیا گیا تھا، ہماری سیسٹم ڈیٹا پر اچھا کام کرتا ہے، اور رسمی طور پر 21 ٹیموں میں 8م رقم رکھتا ہے.", 'sv': "Denna uppsats beskriver ett system för klassificering av teckningsoptioner för SemEval 2018 Task 12, som försöker lära sig semantiska representationer av skäl, anspråk och teckningsoptioner. Systemet består av 3 staplade LSTMs: en av skälet, en för anspråket och en delad Siamese Network för de 2 kandidatoptionerna. Vårt huvudsakliga bidrag är att tvinga in inbäddningarna i ett delat funktionsutrymme med hjälp av vektoroperationer, semantisk liknelsesklassificering, siamesiska nätverk och multi-task learning. Genom att göra det lär vi oss en form av generativ implikation, i kodning av implikationssamband mellan skäl, anspråk och tillhörande korrekta och felaktiga garantier. Vi utökar den begränsade informationen i uppgiften ytterligare genom att använda WordNet synonym 'fuzzing'. När det tillämpas på SemEval 2018 Task 12 presterar vårt system bra på utvecklingsdata och rankas officiellt 8:e bland 21 team.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь SemEval 2018 Task 12-ийн хувилбарын хувилбарын системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь шалтгаан, утга, шалтгааныг суралцахын хичээл юм. Энэ систем нь 3 давхарагдсан LSTMs: нэг шалтгаанаас, нэг шалтгаанаас, нэг нь 2 удирдагчийн шалтгаанаас хуваалцах Siamese Network. Бидний гол зорилго нь вектор үйл ажиллагааг, semantic similarity classification, Siamese networks болон олон ажлын сургалтыг ашиглан холбоотой орон зайд оруулах юм. Ийм зүйлийг хийхэд бид бүтээлч нөлөөлөл, кодлох шалтгаан, утга, харилцааны зөв, буруу зөв харилцааны хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хо Бид үүнийг хязгаарлагдсан мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлж WordNet синонимыг ашиглаж байна. 2018 оны SemEval Task 12-д хэрэглэгдсэн үед бидний систем хөгжлийн өгөгдлийн талаар сайн ажилладаг ба ерөнхийдөө 21 багийн 8-р ангид ажилладаг.', 'vi': "Tờ giấy này mô tả một hệ thống phân hạng trát cho nhiệm vụ SemEvol 11, cái mà cố gắng tìm hiểu các biểu lộ theo ngữ pháp về các lý do, yêu cầu và trát. Hệ thống gồm có 3-Stacked LSTM: một nguyên nhân, một nguyên nhân cho yêu cầu, và một mạng lưới Siamese đã chia sẻ cho ứng viên 2. Phần quan trọng của chúng tôi là buộc sự nhúng vào một không gian chia sẻ sử dụng các thao tác vector, phân loại nét giống nhau, mạng lưới Siamese, và đa nhiệm vụ học. Bằng cách đó, chúng ta học được một hình thức tác động tạo hóa, trong việc mã hóa mối quan hệ liên kết giữa các lý do, yêu cầu, và các giấy phép đúng và sai liên quan. Chúng tôi tăng cường dữ liệu giới hạn trong nhiệm vụ nhờ kết hợp WordNet đồng nghĩa'Fuzzing'. Khi được áp dụng vào nhiệm vụ SemEvl 2008, hệ thống của chúng ta tiến triển tốt với dữ liệu phát triển và chính thức xếp hạng thứ 8th trong số 21.", 'uz': 'Bu qogʻoz SemEval 2018 Vazifani 12 Ishga tayyorlash tizimini anglatadi. Bu sabablar, davom va huquqlar uchun semantik tashkilotlarini o\'rganishni harakat qiladi. Name Bizning asosiy qandaydir vector amallari, semantik tenglashtirish, Siamese tarmoqlari, va bir necha vazifa o\'rganishni ishlatish mumkin. Bunday qilib, biz generativ muvaffaqiyatlarning turini o\'rganamiz, sabablar, davlatlar va bogʻliq haqiqiqiy va notoʻgʻri huquqlarni kodlash mumkin. Biz "muvaffaqiyatli" yordamida WordNet synonym yordamida chegara maʼlumotni qoʻshishmiz. SemEval 2018 Vazifani 12 dasturga qoʻllanganda, bizning tizimmiz taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlarni yaxshi bajaradi va 21 guruhdagi 8 marta boshlanadi.', 'nl': "Dit artikel beschrijft een warrantclassificatiesysteem voor SemEval 2018 Taak 12, dat probeert semantische representaties van redenen, claims en warrants te leren. Het systeem bestaat uit drie gestapelde LSTMs: één voor de reden, één voor de claim, en één gedeeld Siamese Network voor de 2-kandidaat warrants. Onze belangrijkste bijdrage is om de embeddings in een gedeelde feature ruimte te forceren met behulp van vectorbewerkingen, semantische gelijkenisclassificatie, Siamese netwerken en multi-task leren. Daarbij leren we een vorm van generatieve implicatie, in het coderen van implicatieverbindingen tussen redenen, claims en de bijbehorende correcte en onjuiste warrants. We breiden de beperkte data in de taak verder uit door gebruik te maken van WordNet synoniem 'fuzzing'. Bij toepassing op SemEval 2018 Taak 12 presteert ons systeem goed op de ontwikkelingsgegevens en staat officieel 8e onder de 21-teams.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва система за класификация на гаранции за задача 12, която се опитва да научи семантични представи на причини, претенции и гаранции. Системата се състои от 3 подредени ЛТМ: една по причината, една за претенцията и една споделена Сиамска мрежа за двете кандидатски гаранции. Нашият основен принос е да принудим вграждането в споделено функционално пространство с помощта на векторни операции, класификация на семантични сходства, сиамски мрежи и многофункционално обучение. По този начин научаваме форма на генеративна намеса, в кодирането на взаимовръзките между причините, твърденията и свързаните с тях правилни и неправилни гаранции. Ние допълнително увеличаваме ограничените данни в задачата, като използваме синонима на WordNet "размазване". Когато се прилага към задача 12, нашата система се представя добре на данните за разработката и официално се класира на 8-о място сред 21 екипа.', 'hr': "Ovaj papir opisuje sistem klasifikacije naloga za zadatak 12. polovice 2018, koji pokušava naučiti semantičke predstave razloga, zahtjeva i naloga. Sistem se sastoji od 3 postavljenih LSTMs: jedna iz razloga, jedna za zahtjev, i jedna zajednička Siamejska mreža za 2 kandidatske naloge. Naš glavni doprinos je prisiliti integraciju u zajednički prostor koristeći vektorske operacije, semantičku klasifikaciju sličnosti, Siamejske mreže i učenje multizadataka. Tako ćemo naučiti oblik generativne implikacije, u kodiranju implikacijskih odnosa između razloga, tvrdnji i povezanih ispravnih i nepravnih naloga. Povećavamo ograničene podatke u zadatku dalje koristeći WordNet sinonim 'fuzzing'. Kada se primjenjuje na zadatak 12. iz semiEvala 2018, naš sustav dobro obavlja podatke o razvoju, a službeno je postao 8. od 21 tima.", 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver et system til klassificering af warrants for SemEval 2018 Task 12, der forsøger at lære semantiske repræsentationer af årsager, krav og warrants. Systemet består af 3 stablede LSTMs: en af årsagen, en for kravet og en delt Siamese Network for de 2 kandidatwarrants. Vores vigtigste bidrag er at tvinge indlejringerne ind i et fælles funktionsrum ved hjælp af vektoroperationer, semantisk lighedsklassificering, siamesiske netværk og multi-opgave læring. Ved at gøre det, lærer vi en form for generativ implikation, ved at kode implikationsindbyrdes sammenhænge mellem årsager, krav og de tilhørende korrekte og ukorrekte garantier. Vi øger de begrænsede data i opgaven yderligere ved at bruge WordNet synonym 'fuzzing'. Når det anvendes til SemEval 2018 Task 12, klarer vores system godt på udviklingsdata og officielt rangerer 8. blandt 21 teams.", 'de': "Diese Arbeit beschreibt ein Warrant Klassifikationssystem für SemEval 2018 Task 12, das versucht, semantische Darstellungen von Gründen, Ansprüchen und Warrants zu erlernen. Das System besteht aus drei gestapelten LSTMs: einem für den Grund, einem für den Anspruch und einem gemeinsamen Siamese Network für die 2-Kandidaten-Warrants. Unser Hauptbeitrag besteht darin, die Einbettungen in einen gemeinsamen Featureraum mit Vektoroperationen, semantischer Ähnlichkeitsklassifikation, siamesischen Netzwerken und Multi-Task-Lernen zu erzwingen. Dabei lernen wir eine Form der generativen Implikation kennen, indem wir Implikationszusammenhänge zwischen Gründen, Ansprüchen und den damit verbundenen korrekten und falschen Warrants kodieren. Wir erweitern die begrenzten Daten in der Aufgabe weiter, indem wir WordNet-Synonym 'fuzzing' verwenden. Bei SemEval 2018 Task 12 schneidet unser System bei den Entwicklungsdaten gut ab und belegt offiziell den achten Platz unter den 21-Teams.", 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2018Task 12의 자격증 분류 시스템을 설명하는데 이 시스템은 이유, 클레임, 자격증의 의미 표현을 배우려고 한다.이 시스템은 세 개의 겹쳐진 LSTM으로 구성되어 있다. 하나는 원인에 사용되고, 하나는 클레임에 사용되며, 하나는 후보 주권증 2개에 사용되는 공유 샴페인 네트워크이다.우리의 주요 공헌은 벡터 연산, 의미 유사성 분류, 연결 네트워크와 다중 임무 학습을 사용하여 공유된 특징 공간에 강제로 삽입하는 것이다.이렇게 하는 과정에서 우리는 내포된 형식, 즉 원인, 주장과 관련된 정확함과 오류 보증 간의 내포 관계를 인코딩하는 것을 배웠다.WordNet의 동의어인 "fuzzing"을 이용하여 작업 중의 유한한 데이터를 더욱 확장합니다.SemEval 2018 퀘스트 12에 적용되었을 때 우리 시스템은 개발 데이터에서 양호한 모습을 보였고 21개 팀 중 정식으로 8위를 차지했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم محرمانه مجوزی برای کار ۱۲ سال ۲۰۱۸ را توصیف می\u200cکند که سعی می\u200cکند نمایش\u200cهای سنتی از دلایل، ادعا و حکم\u200cها را یاد بگیرد. این سیستم از ۳ LSTMs جمع شده است: یکی به دلیل آن، یکی برای ادعا و یکی از شبکه سیامی برای حکم دو کاندیده شریک شده است. دسترسی اصلی ما این است که انجمن\u200cها را مجبور کنیم به فضای مشترک با استفاده از عملیات ویکتورها، کلیسازی شبیه\u200cهای semantic، شبکه\u200cهای سیامی و یادگیری\u200cهای چندین کار. در این صورت، ما یک شکل تغییرات ژنترافی یاد می گیریم، در رابطه های تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر ما اطلاعات محدودیت را در کار بیشتر افزایش می\u200cکنیم با استفاده از synonym WordNet «fuzzing». زمانی که برای کار ۱۲ سام Eval ۲۰۰۸ کاربرد شد، سیستم ما در اطلاعات توسعه خوب انجام می\u200cدهد و رسمی در میان ۲۱ تیم\u200cها ۸م درجه می\u200cگیرد.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe 'n wagwoord klasifikasie stelsel vir SemEval 2018 Taak 12, wat probeer om semantiese voorstellings van redes, aandrukkings en waardes te leer. Die stelsel bestaan van 3 stacked LSTMs: een vir die rede, een vir die aanvrag, en een gedeelde Siamese Netwerk vir die 2 kandidate waardes. Ons hoofbydrang is om die inbêdings in 'n gedeelde funksie spasie te forseer deur te gebruik vektor operasies, semantiese gelykenis klasifikasie, Siamese netwerke en multi-taak leer. Om dit te doen, leer ons 'n vorm van genereerbare implikasie, in enkodering implikasie interrelasies tussen redes, aandrukkings en die geassosieerde korrekte en verkeerde waardes. Ons verbeter die beperkte data in die taak verder deur word WordNet sinoniem 'fuzzing' te gebruik. Wanneer op SemEval 2018 Opdrag 12 aangepas word, doen ons stelsel goed op die ontwikkelingsdata, en offisieel die 8de onder 21 teams rangeer.", 'sw': "This paper describes a warrant classification system for SemEval 2018 Task 12, that attempts to learn semantic representations of reasons, claims and warrants.  Mfumo unajumuisha watu watatu waliowekwa LSTMs: mmoja kwa sababu, moja kwa madai hayo, na moja imeshirikiana na Mtandao wa Siamese kwa ajili ya matokeo ya wagombea wawili. Mchango wetu mkuu ni kuilazimisha mabadiliko katika nafasi inayoshirikishwa kwa kutumia shughuli za vector, usambazaji wa aina moja kwa moja, mitandao ya Siamese na kujifunza kazi nyingi. Katika kufanya hivyo, tunajifunza a in a ya maamuzi ya kijamii, katika kuingiza mahusiano ya mahusiano kati ya sababu, madai, na vigezo vinavyohusiana sahihi na vibaya. Tunaongeza takwimu zisizo sahihi katika kazi zaidi kwa kutumia mfumo wa mtandao wa WordNet 'kushangaza'. Kama ilivyotumika kwenye kazi ya SemEval 2018, mfumo wetu unafanya kazi vizuri kuhusu takwimu za maendeleo, na kuanzia rasmi ni ya nane kati ya timu 21.", 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem klasifikasi surat perintah untuk SemEval 2018 Tugas 12, yang mencoba untuk belajar persembahan semantis alasan, klaim dan surat perintah. The system consists of 3 stacked LSTMs: one for the reason, one for the claim, and one shared Siamese Network for the 2 candidate warrants.  Our main contribution is to force the embeddings into a shared feature space using vector operations, semantic similarity classification, Siamese networks, and multi-task learning.  In doing so, we learn a form of generative implication, in encoding implication interrelationships between reasons, claims, and the associated correct and incorrect warrants.  We augment the limited data in the task further by utilizing WordNet synonym 'fuzzing'.  When applied to SemEval 2018 Task 12, our system performs well on the development data, and officially ranked 8th among 21 teams.", 'tr': "Bu kağıt, SemEval 2018 Görevi 12 için garantlı klasifikasyon sistemini tasvir ediyor. Bu semantik sebepler, iddialer ve garantlar öğrenmeye çalışıyor. Sistem 3 ýerleşdirilen LST sanynda bar: bir sebäbi, bir iddiala üçin we bir hem 2 kandidýa garanti üçin Siamese Network tarapyndan paýlaşýar. Bizim esasy teklifimiz vektör işlerini, semantik benzeri klasifikasyýa, Siamese şebekleri we multi-täbli öwrenmeleri üçin bölünen ýerlerde güçlendirmektir. Böyle etmek üçin biz jeneral täsirli wajyp öwrenip, kodlemek sebäpleri, iddialar we ýalňyş wajyplaryň arasyndaky aralygyny öwrenip bilýäris WordNet sinonimi 'fuzzing' kullanarak görevde sınırlı verileri arttırıyoruz. SemEval 2018 Görevi 12-ine üýtgedildi we sistemamyz gelişme maglumatyny gowy etýär we resmi ýagdaýda 21 topardan 8-nji sapar paýlaşdy.", 'sq': "This paper describes a warrant classification system for SemEval 2018 Task 12, that attempts to learn semantic representations of reasons, claims and warrants.  Sistemi përbëhet nga 3 LSTM të grumbulluar: një për arsyen, një për pretendimin dhe një Rrjet Siamese të përbashkët për 2 mandatet kandidate. Kontributi ynë kryesor është të detyrojmë përfshirjet në një hapësirë të përbashkët me karakteristika duke përdorur operacionet vektore, klasifikimin semantik të ngjashmërisë, rrjetet Siamese dhe mësimin me shumë detyra. Duke bërë këtë, ne mësojmë një form ë implikimi gjenerativ, në kodimin e implikimit ndërlidhje midis arsyeve, pretendimeve dhe urdhërave korrekte dhe të gabuara të lidhura. We augment the limited data in the task further by utilizing WordNet synonym 'fuzzing'.  When applied to SemEval 2018 Task 12, our system performs well on the development data, and officially ranked 8th among 21 teams.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৮ কাজের ১২ জনের জন্য একটি ওয়ারেন্ট ব্যবহারের ব্যবস্থা বর্ণনা করেছে, যা কারণ, দাবি এবং ওয়ারেন্টের প্রতিনিধিত এই সিস্টেমের মধ্যে ৩ টি স্টেক এলস্টিএমএস রয়েছে: একটি কারণের জন্য, একটি দাবীর জন্য, আর একটি দুই প্রার্থী ওয়ারেন্টের জন্য সিয়ামের নে Our main contribution is to force the embeddings into a shared feature space using vector operations, semantic similarity classification, Siamese networks, and multi-task learning.  In doing so, we learn a form of generative implication, in encoding implication interrelationships between reasons, claims, and the associated correct and incorrect warrants.  ওয়ার্ডনেট সিনোনিয়াম ব্যবহার করে আমরা কাজে সীমিত তথ্য যোগ করি। যখন সেমইভাল ২০১৮ টাস্ক ১২-এ প্রয়োগ করা হয়, তখন আমাদের সিস্টেম উন্নয়নের তথ্য সম্পর্কে ভালো কাজ করে এবং আনুষ্ঠানিকভাবে ২১ টিম', 'am': "ይህ ፕሮግራም ለስራ 12 የተባለውን የስምEval 2018 ስርዓት መክፈቻ ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ የሲስተም ውይይት 3 የተጨማሪው LSTMs ነው፤ አንዱ ምክንያት አንዱ ለጥያቄው አንዱም የሴሜሲ መረብ ለ2 ተቃዋሚዎች የውይይት ትርጓሜ ነው፡፡ የዋነታችን ጠቅላላ መግለጫ የዌctor operators፣ semantic similarity classification፣ መጠምጠኛ መረብ እና ብዙ ስራ ትምህርት ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም፣ የዘረኝነት ግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት ውይይት ማርናለን፡፡ We augment the limited data in the task further by utilizing WordNet synonym 'fuzzing'.  When applied to SemEval 2018 Task 12, our system performs well on the development data, and officially ranked 8th among 21 teams.", 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje sistem klasifikacije naloga za zadatak 12. iz polovice 2018, koji pokušava naučiti semantičke predstave razloga, zahtjeva i naloga. Sistem se sastoji od 3 postavljenih LSTMs: jedna iz razloga, jedna za zahtjev, i jedna zajednička Siamejska mreža za 2 kandidatske naloge. Naš glavni doprinos je prisiliti integraciju u zajednički prostor koristeći vektorske operacije, semantičku klasifikaciju sličnosti, Siamejske mreže i učenje multizadataka. Tako ćemo naučiti oblik generativne implikacije, u kodiranju implikacijskih odnosa između razloga, tvrdnji i povezanih ispravnih i nepravnih naloga. Povećavamo ograničene podatke u zadatku dalje koristeći WordNet sinonim 'fuzzing'. Kada se primjenjuje na 12. zadatak SemEval 2018, naš sistem dobro obavlja podatke o razvoju, i službeno je postao 8. među 21 tima.", 'ca': 'Aquest article descriu un sistema de classificació de mandats per SemEval 2018 Task 12, que intenta aprendre representacions semàntiques de raons, reclamacions i mandats. The system consists of 3 stacked LSTMs: one for the reason, one for the claim, and one shared Siamese Network for the 2 candidate warrants.  La nostra contribució principal és forçar l\'integració en un espai compartit de característiques utilitzant operacions vectorials, classificació semàntica de similitud, xarxes siames i aprenentatge multitascat. Al fer-ho, aprenem una form a d\'implicació generativa, en codificar les implicacions entre raons, reclamacions i les ordens correctes i incorrectes associades. augmentem més les dades limitades de la tasca utilitzant el sinònimde WordNet "fuzzing". When applied to SemEval 2018 Task 12, our system performs well on the development data, and officially ranked 8th among 21 teams.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje klasifikační systém pro SemEval 2018 Task 12, který se pokouší naučit sémantické reprezentace důvodů, nároků a warrantů. Systém se skládá ze tří stohovaných LSTMs: jednoho z důvodu, jednoho pro reklamaci a jednoho sdíleného Siamského sítě pro dva kandidátské opční listy. Naším hlavním příspěvkem je nutit vložení do sdíleného funkčního prostoru pomocí vektorových operací, klasifikace sémantické podobnosti, siamských sítí a víceúlohového učení. Přitom se naučíme formu generativní implikace, při kódování implikačních vztahů mezi důvody, nároky a souvisejícími správnými a nesprávnými zárukami. Omezená data v úkolu dále rozšiřujeme použitím WordNet synonyma "fuzzing". Při aplikaci na SemEval 2018 Task 12 náš systém vychází z vývojových dat dobře a oficiálně místo osmého mezi 21 týmy.', 'hy': "Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է սահմանափակումների դասակարգման համակարգը Սեմեվալ 2018-ի 12-ի համար, որը փորձում է սովորել սեմանտիկ պատճառների, հայտարարությունների և պատճառների ներկայացումներ: Համակարգը կազմված է 3 կույտ LSMT-ից: Առաջինը պատճառով, մեկը պահանջման համար և մեկը կիսված Սիամական ցանց երկու թեկնածու պատվիրանների համար: Մեր հիմնական ներդրումն այն է, որ ստիպենք ներգրավումները տարածված հատկանիշների տարածքում օգտագործելով վեկտորային գործողություններ, սեմանտիկ նմանության դասակարգում, սիամական ցանցեր և բազմախնդիրներ սովորելը: Այդպես անելով, մենք սովորում ենք սերունդային հետևանքների մի տեսակ' կոդավորելով հետևանքների փոխհարաբերությունները պատճառների, փաստարկների և կապված ճիշտ ու սխալ պատվիրանների միջև: Մենք շարունակում ենք ավելացնել սահմանափակ տվյալները, օգտագործելով WordNet սինոնիմը «ֆուզինգ». When applied to SemEval 2018 Task 12, our system performs well on the development data, and officially ranked 8th among 21 teams.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2018 ülesande 12 orderi klassifitseerimise süsteemi, mis püüab õppida semantilisi esitusi põhjustest, nõuetest ja garantiidest. Süsteem koosneb kolmest virnastatud LSTMst: üks põhjusel, üks nõude jaoks ja üks jagatud Siami võrgustik kahe kandidaadi garantii jaoks. Meie peamine panus on sundida manustamine ühisesse funktsiooniruumi vektor operatsioonide, semantilise sarnasuse klassifitseerimise, siaami võrkude ja mitme ülesandega õppimise abil. Seda tehes õpime generatiivse kaasamise vormi, kodeerides kaasamise omavahelisi seoseid põhjuste, väidete ja nendega seotud õigete ja ebaõigete garantiide vahel. Me täiendame piiratud andmeid ülesandes veelgi, kasutades WordNet sünonüümi "fuzzing". SemEval 2018 ülesande 12 rakendamisel toimib meie süsteem arendusandmetega hästi ja oli ametlikult 21 meeskonna seas 8. kohal.', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2018 Task 12:n warranttiluokitusjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､, jossa pyritﾃ､ﾃ､n oppimaan semanttisia esityksiﾃ､ syistﾃ､, vaatimuksista ja warranteista. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ koostuu kolmesta pinotusta LSTMistﾃ､: yhdestﾃ､ syystﾃ､, yhdestﾃ､ vaateesta ja yhdestﾃ､ jaetusta Siamilaisen verkoston kahdesta optiosta. Pﾃ､ﾃ､asiallinen panoksemme on pakottaa upotukset jaettuun ominaisuustilaan vektorioperaatioiden, semanttisen samankaltaisuuden luokittelun, siamilaisten verkkojen ja monitehtﾃ､vﾃ､oppimisen avulla. Nﾃ､in opimme erﾃ､ﾃ､nlaisen generatiivisen implikaation muodon koodaamalla implikaatioiden vﾃ､lisiﾃ､ suhteita syiden, vﾃ､itteiden ja niihin liittyvien oikeiden ja virheellisten takuiden vﾃ､lillﾃ､. Lisﾃ､ﾃ､mme tehtﾃ､vﾃ､n rajallista dataa edelleen hyﾃｶdyntﾃ､mﾃ､llﾃ､ WordNet synonyymiﾃ､ "fuzzing". Sovellettaessa SemEval 2018 Tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n 12 jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme toimii hyvin kehitystiedoissa ja sijoittui virallisesti kahdeksanneksi 21 tiimin joukossa.', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2018-ci SemEval Task 12 üçün yazılı klasifikasyon sistemini təsbiq edir. Bu, semantik səbəblərin, iddiaların və warrantların təsbiqlərini öyrənməyə çalışır. Sistem 3 qoyulmuş LSTMs: bir səbəbdən, bir səbəbdən, bir səbəbdən və bir səbəbdən 2 kandidát warrantlarından paylaşılmış Siames Network idi. Bizim ən böyük qismətimiz vektor işləri, semantik similaritə klasifikasiyası, Siamlı a ğları və çoxlu işin öyrənməsi ilə birləşdirilməkdir. Bəlkə, biz nəticəli implikasyon, kodlama implikasyon, səbəb, iddialar arasındakı ilişkiler və ilişkilərin doğru və yanlış warrantların bir formunu öyrənirik. Sonra WordNet sinonimi 'fuzzing' istifadə edərək qeyri-müddətli məlumatları işlərdə artırırıq. SemEval 2018 Task 12 üçün istifadə edildikdə, sistemimiz gelişmə məlumatlarına yaxşı əməl edir və resmi olaraq 21 dəstə arasında 8-ci dərəcə verir.", 'jv': 'Workspace 1 Sistem sembarang karo 3 sing ditambah KST mruput: sing berarti, sing berarti kanggo awak dhéwé, lan tambah Sinamese Network kanggo awak dhéwé sing apik dhéwé. Where am I Nanging lakoni, kita mulai perusahaan kelas pangan kelas Anyone Awak dhéwé ngewehi nggo semebal 2020 task 12, sistem dhéwé iso nggawe dadi nggawe ngupakan pengguna, lan Perikum dhéwé wis rak tanggal 8-10 sing katêpakan karo 11.', 'he': "This paper describes a warrant classification system for SemEval 2018 Task 12, that attempts to learn semantic representations of reasons, claims and warrants.  המערכת מורכבת משלושה LSTM ערכות: אחת מסיבה, אחת לטענה, ואחת רשת סיאמית משותפת לשני צווי המועמדים. התרומה העיקרית שלנו היא להכריח את התערבות לחלל אופיינים משותף באמצעות פעולות ווקטורים, קליזציה סמנטית של דמיון, רשתות סיאמיות, ולמדות ממשימות רבות. בכך שאנחנו לומדים סוג של השלכות דוריות, בקוד השלכות יחסים בין סיבות, טענות, והצווים הנכונים והלא נכונים. אנו מגדילים את המידע המוגבל במשימה יותר על ידי השימוש בסינונים WordNet 'fuzzing'. כשהתייחסו למשימה 12 של SemEval 2018, המערכת שלנו מצליחה היטב בנתונים הפיתוחים, והרשמית הגיעה לשמונה בין 21 קבוצות.", 'sk': "V prispevku je opisan sistem klasifikacije nalog SemEval 2018 Task 12, ki poskuša naučiti semantične predstavitve razlogov, zahtevkov in nalogov. Sistem je sestavljen iz treh zloženih LSTMs: enega zaradi razloga, enega za terjatev in ene skupne siamske mreže za dva kandidatna naloga. Naš glavni prispevek je prisiliti vdelavo v skupni funkcijski prostor z vektorskimi operacijami, klasifikacijo semantične podobnosti, siamskimi omrežji in večopravilnim učenjem. Pri tem se naučimo oblike generativne implikacije, pri kodiranju implikacijskih medsebojnih povezav med razlogi, trditvami ter s tem povezanimi pravilnimi in napačnimi jamstvi. Omejene podatke v nalogi dodatno povečamo z uporabo WordNet sinonim 'fuzzing'. Ko se uporablja za nalogo 12 SemEval 2018, naš sistem dobro deluje na podlagi razvojnih podatkov in se uradno uvršča na 8. mesto med 21 ekipami.", 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗa ɗa tsarin daraja na Semeval 2018 Tafiyar 12, wanda ke jarraba yin karatun masu motsi na sakan, daidai da kuma ma'anar. @ action: button Bayanmu na ƙari zuwa wani filin da aka raba su zama fili mai haɗuwa da shi, yana amfani da aikin shiryori, mai classified da ɗabi'a, tare da shirin Size, da kuma masu sanar da aiki masu yawa. Idan za mu aikata haka, za'a sanar da wani irin mutane na jama'a, a cikin kodi da danganta masu husũma a tsakanin saba, da daidai da kuma masu haɗi da matsayin gaskiya da kuma ba'a sani ba. Mu ƙara da data wanda aka ƙayyade cikin aikin da za'a yi amfani da sunonim na Wuta 'mai zartar da'. A lokacin da aka Apply wa aikin Semeval 2018, na'ura kanmu yana aiki mai kyau a kan danne-danne, kuma a rasmi ranar da 8 na cikin jama'a 21.", 'bo': 'This paper describes a warrant classification system for SemEval 2018 Task 12, that attempts to learn semantic representations of reasons, claims and warrants. The system consists of 3 stacked LSTMs: one for the reason, one for the claim, and one shared Siamese Network for the 2 candidate warrants. Our main contribution is to force the embeddings into a shared feature space using vector operations, semantic similarity classification, Siamese networks, and multi-task learning. In doing so, we learn a form of generative implication, in encoding implication interrelationships between reasons, claims, and the associated correct and incorrect warrants. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ནང་དུ་ཚད་གཞི་བཙུགས་ཡོད་པའི་བརྗོད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་བྱེད་བཞིན་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཀག འཇུག་སྣོད་ལུ་ SemEval 2018 ལས་ཀ་གནད་དོན་ལྡན་གཉིས་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བར་གནས་ཚུལ་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀ'}
{'en': 'Joker at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'es': 'Joker en la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2018: El argumento de la comprensión del razonamiento con la atención neuronal', 'pt': 'Coringa na SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: O Argumento Raciocinando Compreensão com Atenção Neural', 'ar': 'Joker في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: فهم منطق الحجج باهتمام عصبي', 'fr': "Joker à SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 12\xa0: La compréhension du raisonnement des arguments avec l'attention neuronale", 'ja': 'SemEval -2018のジョーカータスク12 ：神経的な注意を伴う議論の推論理解', 'zh': '小丑在SemEval-2018务12:以神经意论理解', 'hi': 'SemEval-2018 टास्क 12 में जोकर: तंत्रिका ध्यान के साथ तर्क तर्क समझ', 'ru': 'Джокер на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Понимание аргументации с нейронным вниманием', 'ga': 'Joker ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: An Argóint Réasúnaíocht Tuiscint agus Aird Néarach', 'ka': 'SemEval-2018 პარამეტრი 12: აპგუმენტის მიზეზის კომპრენცია ნეირალური დაახლოებით', 'hu': 'Joker a SemEval-2018 12. feladaton: Az érvelés érvelése idegi figyelemmel', 'el': 'Καθήκον 12: Η κατανόηση της επιχειρηματολογίας με τη Νευρική Προσοχή', 'it': "Joker al SemEval-2018 Task 12: L'argomentazione che giustifica la comprensione con attenzione neurale", 'mk': 'Џокер на SemEval-2018 задача 12: Разумирањето на аргументите со неурално внимание', 'lt': 'Joker at SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'kk': 'Жауап-2018 тапсырмасында Джокер 12: Аргументтің түсініктері нейралық қатынау аргументі', 'mn': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12:', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോക്കര്\u200d 12: ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കൊണ്ടുള്ള ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പുതുക്കീകരണം', 'ms': 'Joker at SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'mt': 'Joker at SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'no': 'Joker ved semiEval-2018 oppgåve 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'ro': 'Joker la SemEval-2018 Sarcina 12: Argumentul de înțelegere cu atenție neurală', 'pl': 'Joker w SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Argument uzasadniający zrozumienie z uwagą neuronową', 'sr': 'Joker na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12:Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'si': 'සෙම්වේල්-2018 වැඩ 12 වැඩේ ජෝකර්: ප්\u200dරතිකාරය හේතුවක් සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සමග න්\u200dයූරල් අවධානය සමග', 'sv': 'Joker på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: Argumentet resonerande förståelse med neural uppmärksamhet', 'so': 'Joker at SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் Joker 12: நெயுரல் கவனத்துடன் அருமதி காரணம் முடிவு', 'ur': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'vi': 'Joker at SemEvl-2008 Task 12: A A A A Argument reasonang Compention with Neural Chú ý', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2018 Vazifani 12: Argument Reading Neural Attention سان Yetish', 'nl': 'Joker bij SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Het argument redeneren van begrip met neurale aandacht', 'da': 'Joker ved SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Argumentet begrundelse forståelse med neural opmærksomhed', 'hr': 'Joker na zadatku 12. iz semiEval-2018: Komplikacija za razliku argumenata s neurološkom pažnjom', 'de': 'Joker bei SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 12: Das Argument Reasoning Verstehen mit neuronaler Aufmerksamkeit', 'bg': 'Жокер на Задача 12: Разбирането на аргументите с неврално внимание', 'ko': 'SemEval-18 미션12의 조커: 신경주의력으로 논증 추리 이해', 'tr': 'Joker at SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'id': 'Joker di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Argumen Memahami Dengan Perhatian Neural', 'fa': 'مسخره\u200cکننده در تابع ۲۰۱۸: آرژومی که دلایل توجه عصبی است', 'af': 'Joker by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 12: Die Argument Oorsaak Kompleksie met Neurale Aangaande', 'am': 'Eval-2018 ስራ 12:The Argument Reading Completion with Neural Attention', 'sq': 'Joker at SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'sw': 'Mchangiaji katika kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Msimamo wa Kusoma Msingi wa Kufunguliwa kwa Tamko la Tamko', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের কাজ ১২: নিউরেল মনোযোগ দিয়ে আর্গুমেন্ট পাঠানো হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Joker na semiEval-2018 zadatku 12: Argument razloga komprencije sa neurološkom pažnjom', 'ca': 'Joker a SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'et': 'Joker SemEval-2018 ülesanne 12: Argumenti mõistmise arusaam neuroaalse tähelepanuga', 'fi': 'Jokeri SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: Argumentin järkeilyn ymmärtäminen hermojen huomiolla', 'hy': 'Ջոկերը 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ"-ի 12. հանձնարարությունը. Նյարդային ուշադրության միջոցով ընկալումը', 'az': 'SemEval-2018 Task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention', 'cs': 'Joker na SemEval-2018 Úkol 12: Rozumění argumentů s nervovou pozorností', 'jv': 'Joker nang semebal-2008 task 12: The argument ratioses Compréncion with Neral Attention', 'he': "ג'וקר ב SemEval-2018 משימה 12: הבנה הגיונית לטעון עם תשומת לב נוירואלית", 'ha': 'QNetworkAccessFileBackend', 'sk': 'Joker na SemEval-2018 Naloga 12: Razumevanje argumentov razumevanja z nevralno pozornostjo', 'bo': 'Joker at SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension with Neural Attention'}
{'en': 'This paper describes a classification system that participated in the SemEval-2018 Task 12 : The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Briefly the task can be described as that a natural language argument is what we have, with reason, claim, and correct and incorrect warrants, and we need to choose the correct warrant. In order to make fully understand of the semantic information of the sentences, we proposed a neural network architecture with attention mechanism to achieve this goal. Besides we try to introduce keywords into the model to improve accuracy. Finally the proposed system achieved 5th place among 22 participating systems', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve um sistema de classificação que participou da Tarefa 12 do SemEval-2018: A Tarefa de Compreensão do Raciocínio Argumentativo. Resumidamente, a tarefa pode ser descrita como um “argumento” de linguagem natural é o que temos, com razão, afirmação e garantias corretas e incorretas, e precisamos escolher a garantia correta. A fim de compreender plenamente as informações semânticas das sentenças, propusemos uma arquitetura de rede neural com mecanismo de atenção para atingir esse objetivo. Além disso, tentamos introduzir palavras-chave no modelo para melhorar a precisão. Finalmente o sistema proposto alcançou o 5º lugar entre 22 sistemas participantes', 'fr': "Cet article décrit un système de classification qui a participé à la tâche 12 de SEMEval-2018\xa0: La tâche de compréhension du raisonnement des arguments. En bref, la tâche peut être décrite comme suit\xa0: un «\xa0argument\xa0» en langage naturel est ce que nous avons, avec raison, réclamation et mandats corrects et incorrects, et nous devons choisir le bon mandat. Afin de bien comprendre les informations sémantiques des phrases, nous avons proposé une architecture de réseau de neurones avec mécanisme d'attention pour atteindre cet objectif. En outre, nous essayons d'introduire des mots-clés dans le modèle pour améliorer la précision. Enfin, le système proposé a atteint la 5e place parmi les 22 systèmes participants.", 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام التصنيف الذي شارك في SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Task Understanding. باختصار ، يمكن وصف المهمة على أنها "حجة" لغة طبيعية هي ما لدينا ، مع سبب ، وادعاء ، وأوامر صحيحة وغير صحيحة ، ونحن بحاجة إلى اختيار الأمر الصحيح. من أجل فهم المعلومات الدلالية للجمل بشكل كامل ، اقترحنا بنية شبكة عصبية مع آلية انتباه لتحقيق هذا الهدف. بالإضافة إلى أننا نحاول إدخال كلمات رئيسية في النموذج لتحسين الدقة. أخيرًا ، حقق النظام المقترح المركز الخامس من بين 22 نظامًا مشاركًا', 'es': 'Este artículo describe un sistema de clasificación que participó en la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2018: La tarea de comprensión del razonamiento del argumento. Brevemente, la tarea puede describirse como que lo que tenemos es un «argumento» en lenguaje natural, con motivo, reclamación y órdenes correctas e incorrectas, y necesitamos elegir la orden correcta. Para comprender completamente la información semántica de las oraciones, propusimos una arquitectura de red neuronal con mecanismo de atención para lograr este objetivo. Además, intentamos introducir palabras clave en el modelo para mejorar la precisión. Finalmente, el sistema propuesto logró el quinto lugar entre los 22 sistemas participantes.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एक वर्गीकरण प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है जिसने SemEval-2018 कार्य 12: तर्क तर्क समझ कार्य में भाग लिया। संक्षेप में कार्य को इस रूप में वर्णित किया जा सकता है कि एक प्राकृतिक भाषा "तर्क" वह है जो हमारे पास है, कारण, दावे और सही और गलत वारंट के साथ, और हमें सही वारंट चुनने की आवश्यकता है। वाक्यों की शब्दार्थ जानकारी को पूरी तरह से समझने के लिए, हमने इस लक्ष्य को प्राप्त करने के लिए ध्यान तंत्र के साथ एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव दिया। इसके अलावा हम सटीकता में सुधार करने के लिए मॉडल में खोजशब्दों को पेश करने की कोशिश करते हैं। अंत में प्रस्तावित प्रणाली ने 22 भाग लेने वाली प्रणालियों के बीच 5 वां स्थान हासिल किया', 'zh': '本文述参SemEval-2018务12:论理解分类系统。 简而言之此可述,一自然语言之据,即吾所有,有理有权证,吾须择权证。 为尽句语义信息,发一神经网络架构以成之。 试于模中引入关键字以崇准确性。 最后,拟议的系统在22个参加系统中排名第五', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning理解タスクに参加した分類体系について説明する。簡単に説明すると、このタスクは、自然言語の「議論」が、理性、主張、および正しいと誤った令状を備えたものであり、正しい令状を選択する必要があると言えます。文の意味情報を十分に理解するために、この目標を達成するための注意メカニズムを備えたニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを提案した。さらに、モデルにキーワードを導入して、精度を向上させようとしています。最終的に提案されたシステムは22の参加システムの中で5位を達成した。', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе описывается система классификации, которая участвовала в задаче 12 SemEval-2018: задача понимания аргументации. Вкратце задача может быть описана как то, что естественный язык «аргумент» - это то, что у нас есть, с обоснованием, претензией и правильными и неправильными ордерами, и нам нужно выбрать правильный ордер. Для того, чтобы полностью понять семантическую информацию предложений, мы предложили нейросетевую архитектуру с механизмом внимания для достижения этой цели. Кроме того, мы стараемся вводить в модель ключевые слова для повышения точности. Наконец, предлагаемая система заняла 5-е место среди 22 участвующих систем', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chóras aicmithe a ghlac páirt i dTasc 12 SemEval-2018: An Tasc Tuisceana ar Réasúnaíocht na hAireachta. Go hachomair is féidir cur síos a dhéanamh ar an tasc mar gurb í “argóint” teanga nádúrtha an rud atá againn, le réasún, le héileamh, agus le barántais chearta agus mhíchearta, agus caithfimid an barántas ceart a roghnú. D'fhonn tuiscint iomlán a fháil ar fhaisnéis shéimeantach na n-abairtí, mholamar ailtireacht líonra néaraigh le meicníocht aird chun an sprioc seo a bhaint amach. Ina theannta sin déanaimid iarracht eochairfhocail a thabhairt isteach sa mhúnla chun cruinneas a fheabhsú. Ar deireadh bhain an córas molta an 5ú háit i measc 22 córas rannpháirteach", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy osztályozási rendszert ismertet, amely részt vett a SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasing Comprehension Task című feladatban. Röviden a feladatot úgy leírhatjuk, hogy egy természetes nyelvű "érv" az, amivel rendelkezünk, indokkal, követeléssel, helyes és helytelen garanciákkal, és ki kell választanunk a helyes garanciát. Annak érdekében, hogy teljes mértékben megértsük a mondatok szemantikai információját, egy ideghálózati architektúrát javasoltunk figyelemmechanizmussal a cél eléréséhez. Emellett igyekszünk kulcsszavakat bevezetni a modellbe a pontosság javítása érdekében. Végül a javasolt rendszer ötödik helyet ért el a 22 résztvevő rendszer között', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει ένα σύστημα ταξινόμησης που συμμετείχε στην εργασία 12: Η εργασία κατανόησης επιχειρημάτων. Εν συντομία, το έργο μπορεί να περιγραφεί ως ότι ένα φυσικό γλωσσικό "επιχείρημα" είναι αυτό που έχουμε, με λόγο, αξίωση, και ορθά και λανθασμένα εντάλματα, και πρέπει να επιλέξουμε το σωστό ένταλμα. Προκειμένου να γίνει πλήρως κατανοητή η σημασιολογική πληροφορία των προτάσεων, προτείναμε μια αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικού δικτύου με μηχανισμό προσοχής για την επίτευξη αυτού του στόχου. Εκτός αυτού προσπαθούμε να εισαγάγουμε λέξεις-κλειδιά στο μοντέλο για να βελτιώσουμε την ακρίβεια. Τέλος, το προτεινόμενο σύστημα πέτυχε 5η θέση μεταξύ 22 συμμετεχόντων συστημάτων', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive un sistema di classificazione che ha partecipato al SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. In breve, il compito può essere descritto come che un linguaggio naturale 'argomento' è quello che abbiamo, con ragione, rivendicazione e garanzie corrette e errate, e abbiamo bisogno di scegliere il mandato corretto. Al fine di comprendere appieno l'informazione semantica delle frasi, abbiamo proposto un'architettura di rete neurale con meccanismo di attenzione per raggiungere questo obiettivo. Inoltre cerchiamo di introdurre parole chiave nel modello per migliorare la precisione. Infine il sistema proposto ha raggiunto il 5° posto tra i 22 sistemi partecipanti", 'ka': 'ეს დოკუფიკაციის სისტემის აღწერა, რომელიც SemEval-2018 რაოდენობაში დაწყვეტილი 12: აპგუმენტის მიზეზი კომპრენციის რაოდენობაში. პარამეტრები შეიძლება აღწერა, როგორც ჩვენ გვაქვს, მიზეზით, წარმოადგილებით და დასწორებული და დასწორებული წარმოადგილებით, და ჩვენ გვჭირდება წარმოადგილი წარმოადგილება. სემპანტიკური ინფორმაციის შესახებ, ჩვენ მივიღეთ ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტურაცია, რომელიც აღმოჩენა ამ მიზეზის მიზეზებით. დამატებით ჩვენ დავცდილობთ გასაღების სიტყვების მოდელში გადავიტანოთ მართლა. საბოლოოდ, საკუთარი შესაძლებელი სისტემა 22-ის დაწყვეტილი სისტემაში მივიღეთ 5-ი ადგილი', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama klasifikavimo sistema, kuri dalyvavo 2012 m. pusmečio vertinimo 12 užduotyje „Argument ų pagrindimo išsami užduotis“. Trumpai tariant, užduotis gali būti apibūdinta taip, kad natūrali kalba "argument as" yra tai, ką mes turime, pagrįstai, tvirtindami ir teisingi ir neteisingi įsakymai, ir turime pasirinkti teisingą įsakymą. Siekdami visiškai suprasti semantinę frazių informaciją, pasiūlėme nervų tinklo architektūrą su dėmesio mechanizmu šiam tikslui pasiekti. Be to, bandome įvesti pagrindinius žodžius į model į, kad pagerintume tikslumą. Finally the proposed system achieved 5th place among 22 participating systems', 'kk': "Бұл қағаз жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында қатысу жүйесін таңдайды: Аргументтің түсініктерін шешу тапсырмасы. Бірақ тапсырманы табиғи тіл 'аргумент' деп анықтауға болады, себептерімізде, қажетті және дұрыс және дұрыс бағдарламаларды таңдау керек, біз дұрыс бағдарламаларды таңдау керек. Сөздердің семантикалық мәліметін толық түсіну үшін бұл мақсатты жеткізу үшін невралдық желінің архитектурасын ұсындық. Біз басқа кілттердің сөздерін дұрыстығын жақсарту үшін үлгіге келтіру керек. Соңында ұсынылған жүйе 22 қатысушы жүйелердің 5- ші жеріне жеткізді.", 'mk': 'Овој весник опишува систем на класификација кој учествуваше во задачата 12: Разумнување на аргументите. Накратко задачата може да се опише како природен јазик „аргумент“ е она што го имаме, со причина, тврдење, и коректни и неправилни налоги, и мораме да го избереме вистинскиот налог. За целосно да се разбере семантичката информација за речениците, предложивме нервна мрежа архитектура со механизам на внимание за постигнување на оваа цел. Освен тоа, се обидуваме да ги внесеме клучните зборови во моделот за подобрување на прецизноста. Конечно предложениот систем постигна петто место меѓу 22 учествувачки системи', 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem klasifikasi yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Tugas Pemahaman Argumen. Secara singkat tugas ini boleh digambarkan sebagai bahasa 'argumen' semulajadi adalah apa yang kita ada, dengan alasan, mendakwa, dan waran yang betul dan salah, dan kita perlu memilih waran yang betul. Untuk memahami secara penuh maklumat semantik kalimat, kami melamar arkitektur rangkaian saraf dengan mekanisme perhatian untuk mencapai tujuan ini. Selain itu kita cuba memperkenalkan kata kunci ke dalam model untuk meningkatkan ketepatan. Akhirnya sistem yang diusulkan mencapai tempat ke-5 diantara 22 sistem yang berpartisipasi", 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi sistema ta’ klassifikazzjoni li pparteċipat fil-Kompitu 12 ta’ SemEval-2018: Il-Kompitu ta’ Komprensjoni li Jaġġustifika l-Argument. Fil-qosor il-kompitu jista’ jiġi deskritt bħala li lingwa naturali “argument” hija dak li għandna, bir-raġuni, talba, u mandati korretti u inkorretti, u jeħtieġ li nagħżlu l-mandat korrett. Sabiex nifhmu bis-sħiħ l-informazzjoni semantika tas-sentenzi, ipproponejna arkitettura tan-netwerk newrali b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni biex jinkiseb dan il-għan. Barra minn hekk, nippruvaw jintroduċu kliem ewlieni fil-mudell biex tittejjeb il-preċiżjoni. Fl-aħħar nett is-sistema proposta kisbet il-ħames post fost 22 sistema parteċipanti', 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലി 12- ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു: ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് പുതുക് ഒരു സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയില്\u200d 'ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്\u200dറ്' എന്ന നിലയില്\u200d ഈ ജോലി വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d പറ്റുന്നത് കുറച്ച് പേര്\u200dക്കായിരിക്കും കാരണം, കൃത്യമാ വാക്കുകളുടെ സെമാന്റിക് വിവരങ്ങളെപ്പറ്റി പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം പ്രാപിക്കാന്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര കീവ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d മോഡലിലേക്ക് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റം 22 പങ്കെടുക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 5ാം സ്ഥലം എത്തി", 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system klasyfikacji, który uczestniczył w zadaniu SemEval-2018 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Krótko mówiąc, zadanie można opisać jako, że naturalny język "argument" jest tym, co mamy, z uzasadnieniem, roszczeniem, poprawnymi i nieprawidłowymi nakazami, i musimy wybrać właściwy nakaz. Aby w pełni zrozumieć informację semantyczną zdań, zaproponowaliśmy architekturę sieci neuronowej z mechanizmem uwagi, aby osiągnąć ten cel. Ponadto staramy się wprowadzić do modelu słowa kluczowe w celu poprawy dokładności. Wreszcie proponowany system osiągnął piąte miejsce wśród 22-tych systemów uczestniczących', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie un sistem de clasificare care a participat la SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Pe scurt, sarcina poate fi descrisă ca un "argument" al limbajului natural este ceea ce avem, cu motive, pretenții și garanții corecte și incorecte, și trebuie să alegem mandatul corect. Pentru a înțelege pe deplin informația semantică a propozițiilor, am propus o arhitectură de rețea neurală cu mecanism de atenție pentru atingerea acestui obiectiv. În plus, încercăm să introducem cuvinte cheie în model pentru a îmbunătăți precizia. În cele din urmă, sistemul propus a obținut locul 5 în rândul celor 22 de sisteme participante', 'mn': "Энэ цаас SemEval-2018 Task 12-д оролцсон ангилалын системийг тайлбарлаж байна: Аргументийн шалтгааныг шалтгаалдаг даалгавар. Гэхдээ үүнийг байгалийн хэл 'аргумент' гэдэг нь бидэнд шалтгаан, утга, зөв болон буруу эрх мэдэлтэй зүйл юм. Бид зөв эрх мэдэлийг сонгох хэрэгтэй. Үүний семантик мэдээллийг бүрэн ойлгохын тулд бид энэ зорилго хүртэх механизмтай мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурыг санал болгосон. Бид тодорхой байдлыг сайжруулахын тулд түлхүүр үгийг загвар руу илэрхийлэх гэж оролдож байна. Эцэст нь санал өгсөн систем 22 оролцогчдын 5-р орон хүртэл", 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver eit klassifikasjonssystem som delta i halvEval-2018 oppgåva 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Oppgåva kan skildrast kor mykje som eit naturspråk « argument » er det vi har, med grunn, etterspørsel, og rett og feil ordenar, og vi må velja den rette ordenaren. For å få fullstendig forståelse av semantiske informasjonen om setningane, har vi først eit neuralnettverksarkitektur med oppmerksmekanisme for å oppnå dette målet. I staden prøver vi å introdusera nøkkelord i modellen for å forbetra nøyaktighet. I slutt har det første systemet oppnådd femte plass blant 22 deltakende systemet', 'sr': "Ovaj papir opisuje klasifikacijski sistem koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 12. iz polu Evala-2018: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Uskoro se zadatak može opisati kao da je prirodni jezik 'argument' ono što imamo, sa razlogom, tvrditi i ispravnim i nepravnim nalogom, i moramo odabrati pravu nalog. Da bismo potpuno shvatili semantičku informaciju o rečenicama, predložili smo neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu sa pažnjom mehanizma da ostvarimo ovaj cilj. Osim toga, pokušavamo predstaviti ključne reči u model da bi poboljšali tačnost. Konačno je predloženi sistem postigao peto mesto među 22 sustava sudjelovanja", 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka fasalka oo ka qayb galay Shaqada SemEval-2018 12: Shaqada Heshiiska heshiiska. Shaqada si fudud ah waxaa loo qori karaa in luqada asalka ah 'dooda' waa waxa aan hayno sabab, sababo, dacwad, sax iyo xaqiiq, waxaana u baahan nahay in aan dooranno ogolaanshiyaha saxda ah. Si aan ugu barto macluumaadka labada sano ee erayada, waxaan soo jeednay dhismo shabakad ee neurada ah oo aad u haysato macluumaad aad u hesho goalkan. Intaan ka sokow waxaan isku daynaa in aan u soo bandhijinno hadalka furayaasha modelka si aan u kordhino saxda. ugu dambaysta nidaamka la soo jeeday waxay gaadheen meel 5aad oo ka mid ah 22 nidaamka qayb-qaadashada", 'sv': "Denna uppsats beskriver ett klassificeringssystem som deltog i SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Kort sagt kan uppgiften beskrivas som att ett naturligt språk 'argument' är vad vi har, med anledning, anspråk och korrekta och felaktiga garantier, och vi måste välja rätt garantier. För att fullt ut förstå meningarnas semantiska information föreslog vi en neural nätverksarkitektur med uppmärksamhetsmekanism för att uppnå detta mål. Dessutom försöker vi introducera nyckelord i modellen för att förbättra noggrannheten. Slutligen uppnådde det föreslagna systemet 5:e plats bland 22 deltagande system", 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරවේශණ පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා සම්වේල-2018 වැඩ 12: ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්ප්\u200dරවේශනය වැඩේ සම්ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා. ස්වභාවික භාෂාවක් 'ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක්' කියන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ අපිට හේතුවක්, ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක්, සහ වැරදිය සහ වැරදිය සඳහ වාක්ය ගැන සාමාන්තික තොරතුරු ගැන සම්පූර්ණයෙන් තේරුම් ගන්න, අපි මේ අරමුණ ලබාගන්න අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ නි අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා. අන්තිමේදි ප්\u200dරවේශනය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියේ අන්තිමේදී අන්තිමේදී පද්ධතිය 22ක් අතර පත්", 'ta': "SemEval- 2018 பணியில் பங்கிடப்பட்ட வகுப்பு அமைப்பை இந்த தாள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது: குறிப்பு முடிப்பு பணியை வாங்குகிறது. ஒரு இயல்பான மொழி 'தர்க்கம்' என்பதை குறைவாக விவரிக்கலாம். நாம் காரணத்துடன், கூறுதல், சரியாக மற்றும் தவறான வாக்குறிப்புகளுடன், சரியான அனுமதிகளை  வாக்கியங்களின் அரைப்புரிய தகவல்களை புரிந்து கொள்வதற்கு, நாங்கள் இந்த இலக்கை பெற ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் கட்டுப்பாட்டு முறைமை மாதிரியில் விசையார்த்தைகளை முன்னேற்ற முயற்சிக்க முயற்சிக்கிறோம். கடைசியாக, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு 22 பங்கீட்டு அமைப்புகளில் 5வது இடத்தை அடைந்தது", 'ur': "This paper describes a classification system that participated in the SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. تھوڑا سا دنیا کی تعریف کی جاتی ہے کہ ایک طبیعی زبان 'حجت' یہ ہے جو ہمارے پاس ہے، دلیل کے ساتھ، ادعا، درست اور غلط حجت، اور ہمیں حق حجت کا انتخاب کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. ہم نے اس مقصد کو پہنچانے کے لئے ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک معماری کا مکانیسم کے ساتھ پیش کیا۔ اس کے علاوہ ہم کلید کلمات کو موڈل میں معلوم کرنے کی کوشش کریں کہ دقیقات کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے۔ آخر میں پیشنهاد کی سیستم 22 شرکت سیستموں میں پانچویں جگہ پہنچ گئی", 'uz': "Name Vazifani qisqa aytish mumkin, aslida 'argumenti' deb aytish mumkin, bizda sababi, davom etish, haqiqiqiy va notoʻgʻri huquqlarni tanlashimiz kerak. To'g'ri so'zlarning semantik maʼlumotini o'rganish uchun, biz bu maqsadni erishish uchun neyural tarmoq mualliflarini o'ylab turganmiz. Besides we try to introduce keywords into the model to improve accuracy.  Oxirida talab qilingan tizim 22 bo'lgan tizimlarning 5 chi joyga yetdi", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả một hệ thống phân loại đã tham gia vào Nhiệm vụ SemEvol-208: Nhiệm vụ phức tạp về lý luận. Tóm lại, nhiệm vụ có thể được mô tả như một "tranh luận" ngôn ngữ tự nhiên là thứ chúng ta có, bằng lý lẽ, bằng chứng, và giấy phép đúng và sai, và chúng ta cần phải chọn lệnh bắt đúng. Để hiểu hết các thông tin ngữ pháp của câu, chúng tôi đã đề xuất một kiến trúc mạng thần kinh với cơ chế tập trung để đạt được mục tiêu này. Bên cạnh đó, chúng tôi cố gắng đưa ra từ khoá trong mô hình để nâng cao độ chính xác. Cuối cùng, hệ thống hoạch đã giải quyết nó vào một bộ hệ thống', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва система за класификация, участвала в задача 12: Задачата за разбиране на аргументите. Накратко задачата може да бъде описана като "аргумент" на естествен език е това, което имаме, с основание, претенции и правилни и неправилни гаранции, и ние трябва да изберем правилната гаранция. За да се разбере напълно семантичната информация на изреченията, ние предложихме архитектура на невронната мрежа с механизъм на вниманието за постигане на тази цел. Освен това се опитваме да въведем ключови думи в модела, за да подобрим точността. Накрая предложената система постигна 5-то място сред 22 участващи системи', 'nl': "Dit artikel beschrijft een classificatiesysteem dat deelnam aan de SemEval-2018 Taak 12: De Argument Reasoning Comprehension Taak. Kort gezegd kan de taak worden beschreven als dat een natuurlijke taal 'argument' is wat we hebben, met reden, claim, en correcte en onjuiste warrants, en we moeten de juiste warrant kiezen. Om de semantische informatie van de zinnen volledig te begrijpen, hebben we een neuronale netwerkarchitectuur met aandachtsmechanisme voorgesteld om dit doel te bereiken. Daarnaast proberen we trefwoorden in het model te introduceren om de nauwkeurigheid te verbeteren. Ten slotte behaalde het voorgestelde systeem de vijfde plaats onder de 22-deelnemende systemen", 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver et klassificeringssystem, der deltog i SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Argumentbegrundelse Forståelse Opgave. Kort sagt kan opgaven beskrives som, at et naturligt sprog 'argument' er, hvad vi har, med begrundelse, krav og korrekte og ukorrekte garantier, og vi er nødt til at vælge den korrekte garantier. For at få fuld forståelse af sætningernes semantiske information foreslog vi en neural netværksarkitektur med opmærksomhedsmekanisme for at nå dette mål. Desuden forsøger vi at introducere søgeord i modellen for at forbedre nøjagtigheden. Endelig opnåede det foreslåede system 5. plads blandt 22 deltagende systemer", 'hr': "Ovaj papir opisuje klasifikacijski sustav koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 12. polovičnog razdoblja 2018. godine: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Uskoro se zadatak može opisati kao da je prirodni jezik 'argument' ono što imamo, s razlogom, tvrditi i ispravnim i nepravnim nalogom, i moramo odabrati pravu nalog. Da bismo potpuno razumjeli o semantičkim informacijama o rečenicama, predložili smo arhitekturu neuralne mreže sa pažnjom mehanizam za postizanje ovog cilja. Osim toga, pokušavamo predstaviti ključne riječi u model kako bi poboljšali preciznost. Konačno je predloženi sustav postigao peto mjesto među 22 sustava sudjelovanja", 'id': "Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem klasifikasi yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Tugas Pemahaman Argumen. Briefly the task can be described as that a natural language 'argument' is what we have, with reason, claim, and correct and incorrect warrants, and we need to choose the correct warrant.  Untuk memahami secara penuh informasi semantis kalimat, kami mengusulkan arsitektur jaringan saraf dengan mekanisme perhatian untuk mencapai tujuan ini. Selain itu kita mencoba memperkenalkan kata kunci ke dalam model untuk meningkatkan akurasi. Akhirnya sistem yang diusulkan mencapai tempat ke-5 diantara 22 sistem yang berpartisipasi", 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt ein Klassifizierungssystem, das an der SemEval-2018 Task 12 teilgenommen hat: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Kurz gesagt kann die Aufgabe so beschrieben werden, dass ein natürliches "Argument" ist, was wir haben, mit Grund, Anspruch und korrekten und falschen Warrants, und wir müssen den richtigen Warrant wählen. Um die semantischen Informationen der Sätze vollständig zu verstehen, schlugen wir eine neuronale Netzwerkarchitektur mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus vor, um dieses Ziel zu erreichen. Außerdem versuchen wir Keywords in das Modell einzuführen, um die Genauigkeit zu verbessern. Schließlich erreichte das vorgeschlagene System den fünften Platz unter den 22-teilnehmenden Systemen', 'ko': "본고는SemEval-18 임무12: 논증 추리 이해 임무에 참여하는 분류 시스템을 묘사한다.간단하게 말하면 이 임무는 자연언어의'논점'은 우리가 가진 것으로 이유, 주장, 정확성과 오류의 보증이 있고 우리는 정확한 보증을 선택해야 한다고 묘사할 수 있다.문장의 의미 정보를 충분히 이해하기 위해 우리는 주의 메커니즘을 가진 신경 네트워크 구조를 제시하여 이 목표를 실현했다.그 밖에 우리는 모델에 키워드를 도입하여 정확성을 높이려고 한다.최종적으로 이 시스템은 22개 참여 시스템 중 5위에 올랐다", 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک سیستم گرانشی را توصیف می\u200cکند که در ماموریت نیمه\u200cسال-۲۰۱۸ شرکت می\u200cکند: واژه\u200cهای دلیل تعطیلات. به اندازه\u200cی کمی این کار می\u200cتواند به عنوان توضیح داده شود که یک زبان طبیعی «حجت» چیزی است که با دلیل، ادعا، و حجت درست و غلط داریم، و ما باید حجت درست را انتخاب کنیم. برای اینکه کاملا درک کنیم اطلاعات semantic از جمله ها، ما یک معماری شبکه عصبی را پیشنهاد کردیم با مکانیسم توجه برای رسیدن این هدف. علاوه بر این، سعی می کنیم کلمات کلید را به مدل معرفی کنیم تا دقیق را بهتر کنیم. بالاخره سیستم پیشنهاد پنجم جایی در بین ۲۲ سیستم مشترک رسید', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf 'n klasifikasie stelsel wat deel in die semiEval-2018 taak 12: Die Argument Redigeerder komprehensie taak. Korrek kan die taak beskrywe word as dat 'n natuurlike taal 'argument' is wat ons het, met rede, aanvra, en korrekte en verkeerde waarmee, en ons moet die korrekte waarmee kies. Om die semantiese inligting van die teikens volledig te verstaan, het ons 'n neurale netwerk-arkitektuur voorgestel met aandag mekanisme om hierdie doel te bereik. Ons probeer sleutelwoorde in die model te introduseer om regverdigheid te verbeter. Eindelik het die voorgestelde stelsel 5de plek onder 22 deelnadende stelsels bereik", 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval-2018 Görevi 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Munuň üçin bu zady tebigat dili 'argüm' bolup bilýär. Sebäbimiz bilen, iddia edeniňiz we dogry ýalňyş garanti bolmaly we bize dogry garanti saýlamak gerek. Sözleriň semantik maglumatyny doly düşünmek üçin, bu maksady ýetmek üçin bir nuýral şebeke arhitektegi teklip etdik. Biz aç sözleri dogry ýagdaýy düzeltmek üçin nusga girdirmek synanyşýarys. Soňunda teklip eden sistema 22-nji tarapyndan 5-nji ýer tapdy.", 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa kutangaza na kushiriki kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Kazi ya Kusoma Msimu. Briefly the task can be described as that a natural language 'argument' is what we have, with reason, claim, and correct and incorrect warrants, and we need to choose the correct warrant.  Ili kuelewa kabisa taarifa hizo za kishindani za hukumu hizo, tulipendekeza ujenzi wa mtandao wa neurali wenye mfumo wa kutoa makini ili kufikia lengo hili. Pamoja na hayo tunajaribu kuwasilisha maneno ya ufunguo katika mtindo wa kuboresha uhalisia. Mwisho mfumo ulipendekezwa ulipata nafasi ya 5 kati ya mifumo 22 ya ushiriki", 'sq': "Ky artikull përshkruan një sistem klasifikimi që mori pjesë në detyrën 12 të SemEval-2018: Argumenti që arsyeton detyrën e kuptimit. Për një kohë të shkurtër detyra mund të përshkruhet si se një gjuhë natyrore 'argument' është ajo që ne kemi, me arsye, pretendojmë, dhe urdhërat korrekte dhe të gabuara, dhe ne duhet të zgjedhim urdhërin korrekt. Për të kuptuar plotësisht informacionin semantik të fjalëve, propozuam një arkitekturë rrjeti nervor me mekanizëm vëmendje për të arritur këtë qëllim. Përveç kësaj përpiqemi të futim fjalët kyçe në modelin për të përmirësuar saktësinë. Më në fund sistemi i propozuar arriti vendin e pestë midis 22 sistemeve pjesëmarrës", 'am': "ይህ ገጽ SemEval-2018 ስራ 12 ላይ ተጋፋሚ የነበረውን መግለጫ ስርዓት ይናገራል፤ የአርጉም ማድረግ ማድረግ ስራ ነው፡፡ ስራው የተፈጥሮ ቋንቋ 'ክርክር' እንደሆነ ይግለጽበታል፡፡ በአእምሮ፣ አዋራጅ፣ አስተካክል እና ስህተት እና ስህተት ያለን ፍርድ እና እውነተኛውን ፍርድ መምረጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የቃላትን አስተያየት ለማስታወቅ በሙሉ ለማስተዋል፣ ይህንን መግለጫ ለማግኘት የናቡር መረብ መሠረት አካባቢ አካሄድን ለመዘጋጀት ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም የቁልፎችን ቃላት በሞዴል ለማሳመር እንሞክራለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም የተዘጋጀው ስርዓት በ22 ተካያፊ ስርዓቶች መካከል 5ኛ ስፍራ ደረሰ", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է դասակարգման համակարգը, որը մասնակցել է 2018 թվականի կիսագնահատականի 12. հանձնարարության. բանավեճի ընկալումների հանձնարարության: Կարճ ասած, խնդիրը կարելի է նկարագրել որպես, որ բնական լեզուն "բանավեճ" է այն, ինչ մենք ունենք, իմաստով, պահանջում, ճիշտ և սխալ պատվիրաններ, և մենք պետք է ընտրենք ճիշտ պատվիրանը: Որպեսզի ամբողջովին հասկանանք նախադասությունների սեմանտիկ տեղեկատվությունը, մենք առաջարկեցինք նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություն ուշադրության մեխանիզմ այս նպատակի հասնելու համար: Ավելին, մենք փորձում ենք ներկայացնել հիմնական բառերը մոդելի մեջ, որպեսզի բարելավենք ճշգրտությունը: Վերջապես նախագծված համակարգը հասավ հինգերորդ տեղին 22 մասնակցում համակարգի մեջ,', 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje sistem klasifikacije koji je sudjelovao u zadatku 12. iz poluvremenog razdoblja 2018. godine: Uskoro se zadatak može opisati kao da je prirodni jezik 'argument' ono što imamo, s razlogom, tvrditi i ispravnim i nepravnim nalogom, i moramo odabrati ispravnu nalog. Da bismo potpuno razumjeli o semantičkoj informaciji o rečenicama, predložili smo neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu sa pažnjom mehanizam za postizanje ovog cilja. Osim toga, pokušavamo predstaviti ključne riječi u model da bi poboljšali preciznost. Konačno je predloženi sistem postigao peto mjesto među 22 sustava sudjelovanja", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje klasifikační systém, který se podílel na SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Stručně lze tento úkol popsat tak, že "argument" v přirozeném jazyce je to, co máme, s důvodem, nárokem a správnými a nesprávnými rozkazy, a my musíme zvolit správný rozkaz. Abychom plně porozuměli sémantické informaci vět, navrhli jsme architekturu neuronové sítě s mechanismem pozornosti k dosažení tohoto cíle. Kromě toho se snažíme do modelu zavést klíčová slova pro zlepšení přesnosti. Navrhovaný systém získal páté místo mezi 22 zúčastněnými systémy', 'az': "Bu kağıt SemEval-2018 Gözəli 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task'da iştirak edən klasifikasyon sistemini təsdiqləyir. Həqiqətən, bu işin təbiətli dil 'argument' bizim sahibimiz səbəb, iddiasıyla, düzgün və yanlış dəlillərimiz olduğu və doğru dəlilləri seçmək lazımdır. Sözümlərin semantik məlumatlarını tamamlamaq üçün bu məqsədilə yetişmək üçün nöral a ğ arhitektarını təklif etdik. Biz anahtar sözlərini düzgün göstərmək üçün modellə tanışmağa çalışırıq. Sonunda təklif edilən sistem 22 iştirakçı sistemlərin arasında 5. yerinə yetişdi.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan luokitusjärjestelmä, joka osallistui SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task. Lyhyesti sanottuna tehtävää voidaan kuvata siten, että luonnollinen "argumentti" on se, mitä meillä on, syy, väite, oikeat ja virheelliset takuut, ja meidän on valittava oikea takuu. Jotta lauseiden semanttinen tieto saataisiin täysin ymmärretyksi, ehdotimme neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuria huomiomekanismilla tämän tavoitteen saavuttamiseksi. Lisäksi yritämme tuoda avainsanoja malliin tarkkuuden parantamiseksi. Lopuksi ehdotettu järjestelmä saavutti viidennen sijan 22 osallistuvan järjestelmän joukossa', 'bn': "এই কাগজটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করা একটি ক্লাস্ফিকেশন ব্যবস্থা বর্ণনা করেছে: আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরুদ্ধার করা কাজ। সংক্ষিপ্ত কাজের ব্যাখ্যা করা যাবে যে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় 'যুক্তি' আমাদের কাছে যা আছে কারণ, দাবি করা, সঠিক এবং ভুল ওয়ারেন্ট, আর আমাদের সঠি এই বাক্যের সেমান্টিক তথ্য সম্পর্কে সম্পূর্ণ বুঝতে পারার জন্য আমরা একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো প্রস্তাব করেছিলাম যারা এই লক্ষ্য এছাড়াও আমরা মোডেলের মধ্যে কী শব্দ পরিচিত করার চেষ্টা করি যাতে সঠিকভাবে উন্নত করা। Finally the proposed system achieved 5th place among 22 participating systems", 'ca': "Aquest article descriu un sistema de classificació que va participar en la tasca 12 de SemEval-2018: La tasca d'entendre la raonació d'arguments. Briefly the task can be described as that a natural language 'argument' is what we have, with reason, claim, and correct and incorrect warrants, and we need to choose the correct warrant.  Per tal d'entendre plenament la informació semàntica de les frases, vam proposar una arquitectura de xarxa neural amb mecanisme d'atenció per aconseguir aquest objectiu. A més, intentem introduir paraules clau al model per millorar la precisió. Finalment, el sistema proposat va aconseguir el 5è lloc entre 22 sistemes participants", 'et': 'K채esolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse klassifitseerimiss체steemi, mis osales SemEval-2018 체lesandes 12: Argumenti p천hjendamise 체lesandes. L체hidalt v천ib 체lesannet kirjeldada nii, et looduskeelne argument on see, mis meil on p천hjuse, v채ite ning 천igete ja eba천igete garantiidega ning me peame valima 천ige garantii. Selleks et t채ielikult aru saada lausete semantilisest informatsioonist, pakkusime selle eesm채rgi saavutamiseks v채lja n채rviv천rgu arhitektuuri koos t채helepanumehhanismiga. Lisaks p체체ame lisada m채rks천nad mudeli t채psuse parandamiseks. L천puks saavutas kavandatud s체steem 22 osalevast s체steemist viienda koha', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem klasifikacije, ki je sodeloval pri nalogi SemEval-2018 12: Razumevanje argumentov. Na kratko lahko nalogo opišemo tako, da je "argument" naravnega jezika tisto, kar imamo z razlogom, trditvijo ter pravilnimi in napačnimi jamstvi, zato moramo izbrati pravilen nalog. Da bi v celoti razumeli semantične informacije stavkov, smo predlagali arhitekturo nevronskega omrežja z mehanizmom pozornosti za dosego tega cilja. Poleg tega poskušamo vnesti ključne besede v model, da bi izboljšali natančnost. Nazadnje je predlagani sistem dosegel 5. mesto med 22 sodelujočimi sistemi', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר מערכת סיווג שהשתתפה במשימה "SemEval-2018 Task 12: The Argument Reasoning Comprehension Task". בקצרה, המשימה יכולה לתאר כאילו שפה טבעית "טיעון" היא מה שיש לנו, עם סיבה, טענה, וצורות נכונות ולא נכונות, ואנחנו צריכים לבחור הצו הנכון. כדי להבין לחלוטין את המידע הסמנטי של המשפטים, הצענו ארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית עם מנגנון תשומת לב כדי להשיג את המטרה הזאת. חוץ מזה אנחנו מנסים להציג מילים מפתחות למודל כדי לשפר את הדיוק. סוף סוף המערכת המוצעת השיגה מקום חמישי בין 22 מערכות משתתפות', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗa ɗa wata sifilacce wanda ya yi shirin su cikin aikin SemEV-2018 12: Tafiyar da Hazarar da Akwai Mai Completion. Kaɗan ɗan daidai an bayyana aikin a kama da wata harshen 'murafa' na asili yana da abin da ke da, da hakki, da hakki, da kuma da hakki, kuma ana buƙata mu zãɓi dalĩli mai gaske. To, dõmin ya fahimta cikakken lãbãri na semanti na maganar, sai muka buƙata wani matsayi na'urar tarakiki na neura da zane-bincike zuwa wannan goan. Bayan haka, Munã jarraba ka ƙara kalmõmi cikin shirin ayuka dõmin ya gyara tsari. Ga ƙarshe, na'urar da aka wajabta matsayin 5th between 22 na'urar mutumci", 'jv': 'This paper description a category buddy Mbok kanggo ngerasakno sing luwih akeh sistem semanti karo perasaan kuwi, awak dhéwé ngerasakno Arkturaturan Neral sing nganggep manipulan kanggo ngerasakno iki. Tanggah awak dhéwé ngewat dadi gambaran seneng model kanggo nggawe gerakan dadi. Sistem ono nggawe sistem sing rumangsa tanggal 5 sampeyan 22 sistem sing bisa nguasai', 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval-2018 Task 12 ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་པའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Briefly the task can be described as that a natural language 'argument' is what we have, with reason, claim, and correct and incorrect warrants, and we need to choose the correct warrant. དེ་ལ་ཚིག་གི་སེམས་ཆུང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཡོད་པ་ལ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྐྱེས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་བཟོ་སྐྲུན་དང་། སྒྲིག་ཆས་འདི་ལ་ འུ་ཚོས་མིག་ལམ་དུ་གཙོ་ཚིག་ཚིག་དག་གི་མིག་ལམ་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་འདོད་པ་ཡིན། མཐའ་མ་དེ་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་རྒྱལ་སྤྲོད་པའི་དུས་ལྔའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལྔའི་ནང་ཤིག་བྱུང་།"}
{'en': 'TRANSRW at SemEval-2018 Task 12 : Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'ar': 'TRANSRW في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: تحويل التمثيلات الدلالية لفهم منطق الحجج', 'es': 'TRANSRW en la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2018: Transformar las representaciones semánticas para la comprensión del razonamiento argumentativo', 'fr': 'TRANSRW au SEMEVAL-2018 Tâche 12\xa0: Transformer les représentations sémantiques pour la compréhension du raisonnement des arguments', 'pt': 'TRANSRW no SemEval-2018 Tarefa 12: Transformando Representações Semânticas para Compreensão de Raciocínio Argumentativo', 'zh': 'TRANSRW at SemEval-2018 务 12:为证理解转语义', 'ja': 'TRANSRW at SemEval -2018 Task 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Understanding', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2018 कार्य 12 पर TRANSRW: तर्क तर्क समझ के लिए शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व को बदलना', 'ru': 'TRANSRW на SemEval-2018 Задача 12: Преобразование семантических представлений для понимания аргументации', 'ga': 'TRANSRW ag SemEval-2018 Tasc 12: Léirithe Séimeantacha a Chlaochlú chun Tuiscint ar Réasúnaíocht Argóintí', 'ka': 'TRANSRW semiEval-2018 პარამეტრი 12: სემანტიკური გამოსახულებების გარემონსტრანსტურაცია აპგუმენტის მიზეზების შემდეგ', 'hu': 'TRANSRW a SemEval-2018 12. feladaton: A szemantikus reprezentációk átalakítása az érvelések értelmezéséhez', 'el': 'Εργασία 12: Μεταμόρφωση των Σημαντικών Αντιπροσωπειών για την κατανόηση της αιτιολογίας επιχειρημάτων', 'it': 'TRANSRW al SemEval-2018 Task 12: Trasformare le rappresentazioni semantiche per la comprensione della ragione degli argomenti', 'kk': 'TRANSRW 12- тапсырмасында: Аргументтің себептерін түзету үшін Semantic Representations transforming for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'lt': 'TRANSRW 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 12 užduotis: Semantinių atstovybių pertvarkymas argumentams pagrįsti', 'mk': 'TRANSRW на SemEval-2018 задача 12: Трансформирање семантични претставувања за разбирање на расправијата', 'ms': 'TRANSRW di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Mengubah Perwakilan Semantik untuk Pemahaman Memakai Argumen', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ടാസ്ക് 12- ല്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്രുവി: ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'TRANSRW at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'mn': 'TRANSRW at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'no': 'TRANSRW på semiEval-2018 oppgåve 12: Transformerer semiantiske representasjonar for komprehensing av argument', 'pl': 'TRANSRW na SemEval-2018 Zadanie 12: Transformacja reprezentacji semantycznych dla zrozumienia argumentów', 'ro': 'TRANSRW la SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transformarea reprezentărilor semantice pentru înțelegerea raționamentului argumentelor', 'sr': 'TRANSRW na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 12: transformacija semantičkih predstavljanja za kompresiju razloga Argumenta', 'si': 'TRANSRW at semeval-2018 Job 12: Transfer semantic', 'so': 'Shaqoodka SemEval-2018', 'sv': 'TRANSRW på SemEval-2018 Uppgift 12: Omvandla semantiska representationer för förståelse av argumentresonemang', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2018 பணியில் ட்ரான்ஸ்ருவ்: பதிப்பு முடிப்புக்கான செமான்டிக் காட்சிகளை மாற்றுகிறது', 'ur': 'TRANSRW at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'XÁC NHẬN CHUYỂN Tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-thẩm 8 12: Thay đổi Trung Quốc Phụ trách về quy trình biện hộ Lý luận.', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Трансформиране на семантичните представи за разбиране на аргументите', 'hr': 'TRANSRW na zadatku 12: transformacija semantičkih predstavljanja za kompresiju razloga Argumenta', 'da': 'TRANSRW på SemEval-2018 Opgave 12: Transformation af semantiske repræsentationer til argumentbegrundelse forståelse', 'nl': 'TRANSRW op SemEval-2018 Taak 12: Transformeren van semantische representaties voor het begrijpen van argumenten', 'id': 'TRANSRW di SemEval-2018 Tugas 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'fa': 'TRANSRW در تابع ۱۲ در نیم Eval-۲۰۰۸: تغییر نمایش\u200cهای سیمانتیک برای تغییر دلایل دلایل\u200cهای اروмент', 'de': 'TRANSRW auf der SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 12: Transformation semantischer Repräsentationen für das Verständnis von Argumenten', 'ko': 'TRANSRW가SemEval-18에서의 임무12: 의미 변환으로 논증 추리를 이해한다', 'sw': 'TRANSRW kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2018 12: Kubadilisha Mazungumzo ya Semantic kwa ajili ya Kufunguliwa kwa Ajili', 'tr': 'TRANSRW at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'af': 'TRANSRW by SemEval-2018 Opdrag 12: Transformeer Semantiese voorstellings vir Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'sq': 'TRANSRW në SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'am': 'ስራ 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reading Completion', 'hy': 'Transforme', 'az': 'TRANSRW at semiEval-2018 Task 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজ ১২-এ ট্রান্সRW: আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরুদ্ধার করার জন্য সেম্যান্টিক প্রতিনিধি রাখা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'TRANSRW na pola Evala-2018 zadatku 12: transformacija semantičkih predstavljanja za kompresiju razloga Argumenta', 'ca': 'TRANSRW a SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'cs': 'TRANSRW na SemEval-2018 Úkol 12: Transformace sémantických reprezentací pro porozumění argumentů', 'et': 'TRANSRW SemEval-2018 Ülesanne 12: Semantiliste esinduste muutmine argumentide mõistmiseks', 'fi': 'TRANSRW SemEval-2018 Tehtävä 12: Semanttisten representaatioiden muuttaminen argumentin järkeilyn ymmärtämiseksi', 'sk': 'TRANSRW na SemEval-2018 Naloga 12: Preoblikovanje semantičnih predstavitev za razumevanje argumentov', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'he': 'משימה 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension', 'jv': 'TRANsrw at semiinval-2008 task 12: Transforming semanti representations for argument Regarding Compréncion', 'bo': 'TRANSRW at SemEval-2018 Task 12: Transforming Semantic Representations for Argument Reasoning Comprehension'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system in SemEval-2018 task 12 : Argument Reasoning Comprehension. The task is to select the correct warrant that explains reasoning of a particular argument consisting of a claim and a reason. The main idea of our methods is based on the assumption that the semantic composition of the reason and the warrant should be close to the semantic representation of the corresponding claim. We propose two neural network models. The first one considers two warrant candidates simultaneously, while the second one processes each candidate separately and then chooses the best one. We also incorporate sentiment polarity by assuming that there are kinds of sentiment associations between the reason, the warrant and the claim. The experiments show that the first framework is more effective and sentiment polarity is useful.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا في SemEval-2018 المهمة 12: فهم استدلال الحجج. وتتمثل المهمة في تحديد الأمر الصحيح الذي يشرح منطق حجة معينة تتكون من مطالبة وسبب. تعتمد الفكرة الرئيسية لأساليبنا على افتراض أن التركيب الدلالي للسبب والمذكرة يجب أن يكون قريبًا من التمثيل الدلالي للادعاء المقابل. نقترح نموذجين للشبكة العصبية. الأول يأخذ في الاعتبار اثنين من المرشحين في وقت واحد ، بينما يعالج الثاني كل مرشح على حدة ثم يختار الأفضل. ندمج أيضًا استقطاب المشاعر من خلال افتراض أن هناك أنواعًا من ارتباطات المشاعر بين السبب والمذكرة والمطالبة. تظهر التجارب أن الإطار الأول أكثر فعالية وأن قطبية المشاعر مفيدة.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système dans SEMEval-2018 task 12\xa0: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. La tâche consiste à sélectionner le bon mandat qui explique le raisonnement d'un argument particulier constitué d'une réclamation et d'un motif. L'idée principale de nos méthodes repose sur l'hypothèse que la composition sémantique de la raison et du mandat doit être proche de la représentation sémantique de la revendication correspondante. Nous proposons deux modèles de réseaux neuronaux. Le premier considère deux candidats au mandat simultanément, tandis que le second traite chaque candidat séparément, puis choisit le meilleur. Nous intégrons également la polarité des sentiments en supposant qu'il existe des types d'associations de sentiments entre la raison, le mandat et la réclamation. Les expériences montrent que le premier cadre est plus efficace et que la polarité des sentiments est utile.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro sistema en la tarea 12 de SemEval-2018: Comprensión de razonamiento de argumentos. La tarea consiste en seleccionar la orden correcta que explique el razonamiento de un argumento particular que consiste en una reclamación y una razón. La idea principal de nuestros métodos se basa en el supuesto de que la composición semántica de la razón y la garantía debe estar cerca de la representación semántica de la reclamación correspondiente. Proponemos dos modelos de redes neuronales. El primero considera a dos candidatos a Warrant simultáneamente, mientras que el segundo procesa a cada candidato por separado y luego elige el mejor. También incorporamos la polaridad del sentimiento al asumir que hay tipos de asociaciones de sentimiento entre la razón, la orden y la reclamación. Los experimentos muestran que el primer marco es más eficaz y que la polaridad del sentimiento es útil.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema na tarefa 12 do SemEval-2018: Compreensão de Raciocínio de Argumentos. A tarefa é selecionar a garantia correta que explica o raciocínio de um argumento específico consistindo em uma afirmação e uma razão. A ideia principal dos nossos métodos baseia-se no pressuposto de que a composição semântica da razão e da garantia deve estar próxima da representação semântica da afirmação correspondente. Propomos dois modelos de rede neural. O primeiro considera dois candidatos garantidos simultaneamente, enquanto o segundo processa cada candidato separadamente e escolhe o melhor. Também incorporamos a polaridade do sentimento assumindo que existem tipos de associações de sentimento entre a razão, a garantia e a alegação. Os experimentos mostram que a primeira estrutura é mais eficaz e a polaridade de sentimento é útil.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2018タスク12 ：議論の推論理解における私たちのシステムについて説明します。請求と理由からなる特定の議論の推論を説明する正しい令状を選択することです。私たちの方法の主なアイデアは、理由と令状の意味的構成が対応する主張の意味的表現に近いものであるべきであるという仮定に基づいています。2つのニューラルネットワークモデルを提案します。最初の1人は2人の令状候補者を同時に検討し、2人目はそれぞれの候補者を個別に処理し、最良の候補者を選択します。また、理由、令状、請求の間には、様々な感情の関連があると仮定して、感情の極性を取り入れています。実験は、最初のフレームワークがより効果的であり、感情の極性が有用であることを示しています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2018 कार्य 12: तर्क तर्क समझ में हमारी प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है। कार्य सही वारंट का चयन करना है जो एक विशेष तर्क के तर्क की व्याख्या करता है जिसमें एक दावा और एक कारण शामिल है। हमारे तरीकों का मुख्य विचार इस धारणा पर आधारित है कि कारण और वारंट की शब्दार्थ संरचना संबंधित दावे के शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व के करीब होनी चाहिए। हम दो तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पहला एक साथ दो वारंट उम्मीदवारों पर विचार करता है, जबकि दूसरा एक प्रत्येक उम्मीदवार को अलग से संसाधित करता है और फिर सबसे अच्छा चुनता है। हम यह मानते हुए भावना ध्रुवीयता को भी शामिल करते हैं कि कारण, वारंट और दावे के बीच भावना संघों के प्रकार हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि पहला ढांचा अधिक प्रभावी है और भावना ध्रुवीयता उपयोगी है।', 'zh': '本文述我系统于SemEval-2018务12:参数推理。 务者,择正权证,说由索赔特定论也。 吾道之大要,本于此者,与权证语义相近之语义也。 二神经网络模形。 首虑两授权选人,而二分处分,然后择其最上者一。 假设之由,权索赔之间,情有所关,以纳情极性。 实验明,首框架更效,情极性有用。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система в SemEval-2018 задача 12: Понимание аргументации. Задача состоит в том, чтобы выбрать правильный ордер, который объясняет мотивировку конкретного аргумента, состоящего из претензии и причины. Основная идея наших методов основана на предположении, что семантический состав причины и ордера должен быть близок к семантическому представлению соответствующей претензии. Предложены две модели нейронных сетей. Первый рассматривает двух кандидатов одновременно, в то время как второй обрабатывает каждого кандидата отдельно, а затем выбирает лучший. Мы также включаем полярность настроений, предполагая, что между причиной, ордером и претензией существуют различные ассоциации настроений. Эксперименты показывают, что первая структура более эффективна и полярность настроений полезна.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras i dtasc 12 SemEval-2018: Tuiscint ar Réasúnú Argóint. Is é an tasc atá ann ná an barántas ceart a roghnú a mhíníonn réasúnaíocht argóint ar leith ina bhfuil éileamh agus cúis. Tá príomh-smaoineamh ár modhanna bunaithe ar an toimhde gur chóir go mbeadh comhdhéanamh shéimeantach an chúis agus an bharántais gar do léiriú shéimeantach an éilimh chomhfhreagraigh. Molaimid dhá mhúnla líonra néarúil. Déanann an chéad cheann dhá iarrthóir barántas a mheas go comhuaineach, agus déanann an dara ceann gach iarrthóir a phróiseáil ar leithligh agus ansin roghnaíonn sé an ceann is fearr. Ionchorpraímid freisin polaraíocht na meon trí ghlacadh leis go bhfuil cineálacha de chomhcheangal meon idir an chúis, an barántas agus an t-éileamh. Léiríonn na turgnaimh go bhfuil an chéad chreat níos éifeachtaí agus go bhfuil polaraíocht meon úsáideach.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας στην εργασία 12: Κατανόηση επιχειρημάτων. Το καθήκον είναι να επιλέξετε το σωστό ένταλμα που εξηγεί την αιτιολογία ενός συγκεκριμένου επιχειρήματος που αποτελείται από μια αξίωση και έναν λόγο. Η κύρια ιδέα των μεθόδων μας βασίζεται στην υπόθεση ότι η σημασιολογική σύνθεση του λόγου και του δικαιολογητικού πρέπει να είναι κοντά στη σημασιολογική αναπαράσταση του αντίστοιχου ισχυρισμού. Προτείνουμε δύο μοντέλα νευρικών δικτύων. Ο πρώτος εξετάζει ταυτόχρονα δύο υποψήφιους ένταλμα, ενώ ο δεύτερος επεξεργάζεται κάθε υποψήφιο ξεχωριστά και στη συνέχεια επιλέγει τον καλύτερο. Επίσης ενσωματώνουμε την πολικότητα των συναισθημάτων υποθέτοντας ότι υπάρχουν είδη συσχετισμών συναισθημάτων μεταξύ του λόγου, του δικαιολογητικού και του ισχυρισμού. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το πρώτο πλαίσιο είναι πιο αποτελεσματικό και η πολικότητα των συναισθημάτων είναι χρήσιμη.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემას SemEval-2018 დავალებში აღწერა 12: აპგუმენტის მიზეზი კომპრენციაში. დავალება არის მონიშნოთ მარტივი დაწყვეტი, რომელიც განახსნა განსაკუთრებული არგუმენტის პარამენტი, რომელიც არგუმენტი და მიზეზის შეფარდება. ჩვენი მეტოვების მნიშვნელოვანი იდეა იგივეა, რომ სემონტიკური კომპოზიცია მიზეზის და დასაწყისი უნდა იყოს სემონტიკური გამოსახულება შესაძლებელია. ჩვენ მუშაობთ ორი ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელი. პირველი იფიქრობს ორი კანდიდენტები ერთად, როცა მეორე ერთი პროცესი ყოველ კანდიდენტის განყოფილი და შემდეგ იგივე უკეთესი. ჩვენ ასევე სენტიმენტის პოლარიტება დავყენებთ, რომ არსებობს სენტიმენტის აზოციაციები მიზეზის, დასაწყვეტის და საწყვეტის შორის. ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენებს, რომ პირველი ფრამეტრი უფრო ეფექტიურია და სენტიმენტების პოლარიტია საჭიროა.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a rendszerünket a SemEval-2018 feladat 12: Argument Reasing Comprehension. A feladat a megfelelő parancs kiválasztása, amely magyarázza a követelésből és okból álló bizonyos érvek indoklását. Módszereink fő elképzelése azon a feltételezésen alapul, hogy az ok és a parancs szemantikai összetételének közel kell lennie a megfelelő igény szemantikai ábrázolásához. Két ideghálózati modellt javasolunk. Az első egyidejűleg két jelöltet vesz figyelembe, a második pedig minden jelöltet külön-külön dolgozza fel, majd kiválasztja a legjobbat. Az érzelmi polaritást is beépítjük azzal, hogy feltételezzük, hogy vannak fajta érzelmi kapcsolatok az ok, a parancs és a követelés között. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy az első keretrendszer hatékonyabb és az érzelmi polaritás hasznos.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema in SemEval-2018 task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Il compito è quello di selezionare il mandato corretto che spieghi il ragionamento di un particolare argomento costituito da un reclamo e una ragione. L'idea principale dei nostri metodi si basa sul presupposto che la composizione semantica della ragione e del mandato dovrebbe essere vicina alla rappresentazione semantica della rivendicazione corrispondente. Proponiamo due modelli di rete neurale. Il primo considera contemporaneamente due candidati warrant, mentre il secondo elabora ogni candidato separatamente e poi sceglie il migliore. Incorporamo anche la polarità sentimentale supponendo che ci siano tipi di associazioni sentimentali tra la ragione, il mandato e la rivendicazione. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il primo framework è più efficace e la polarità sentimentale è utile.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama mūsų sistema 12 užduotyje „SemEval-2018“. Įsipareigojimas – pasirinkti teisingą įsakymą, kuriame būtų paaiškintas konkretaus argumento, kurį sudaro reikalavimas ir priežastis, pagrindimas. The main idea of our methods is based on the assumption that the semantic composition of the reason and the warrant should be close to the semantic representation of the corresponding claim.  Siūlome du nervų tinklo modelius. Pirmasis vienu metu vertina du kandidatus, o antrasis atskirai nagrinėja kiekvieną kandidatą ir pasirinka geriausią. We also incorporate sentiment polarity by assuming that there are kinds of sentiment associations between the reason, the warrant and the claim.  Eksperimentai rodo, kad pirmoji sistema yra veiksmingesnė, o jausmų poliarumas yra naudingas.', 'mk': 'This paper describes our system in SemEval-2018 task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension.  Задачата е да се избере вистинскиот налог кој објаснува размислување за одреден аргумент кој се состои од тврдење и причина. Главната идеја за нашите методи се базира на претпоставката дека семантичното составување на причината и налогот треба да биде блиску до семантичното претставување на соодветното тврдење. Предложуваме два модели на нервната мрежа. Првиот разгледува двајца кандидати за налог истовремено, додека вториот ги процесира секој кандидат одделно и потоа го избира најдобриот. Ние, исто така, вклучуваме поларитет на чувствата претпоставувајќи дека постојат видови на асоцијации на чувства меѓу причината, налогот и тврдењето. Експериментите покажуваат дека првата рамка е поефикасна и дека чувствителната поларитет е корисна.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің жүйемізді жарым- 2018 тапсырмасында 12- деп таңдайды: Аргументтің себептерін түсіндіру. Тапсырма - сұраныс мен себептердің аргументті түсініп беретін дұрыс орранды таңдау. Біздің әдістеріміздің негізгі идеясы, себептің семантикалық құрылымының және ортаның сәйкестігінің семантикалық келтіріміне жақын болу үшін негізгі идеясы. Біз екі неврал желі үлгілерін ұсынамыз. Біріншісі екі бағдарламаны бір-біріне қарайды, екіншісі бір кандидатты бір-біріне қарайды, содан кейін ең жақсы бағдарламаны таңдайды. Сонымен қатар, сезімдердің поляриялығын бастап, сезімдердің арасындағы сезімдердің бірнеше түрлі қатынасы бар деп ойлаймыз. Тәжірибелер бірінші қоршау көмектесілі және сезімдердің поляриясы пайдалы.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita dalam SemEval-2018 tugas 12: Pemahaman Memakai Argumen. Tugas adalah untuk memilih waran yang betul yang menjelaskan alasan bagi argumen tertentu yang terdiri dari klaim dan alasan. Idea utama kaedah kita berdasarkan asumsi bahawa komposisi semantik sebab dan waran seharusnya dekat dengan perwakilan semantik dari tuntutan yang sepadan. Kami cadangkan dua model rangkaian saraf. Yang pertama mempertimbangkan dua calon waran secara bersamaan, sementara yang kedua memproses setiap calon secara terpisah dan kemudian memilih yang terbaik. Kami juga memasukkan polariti perasaan dengan menganggap bahawa ada jenis persekutuan perasaan antara sebab, waran dan tuntutan. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kerangka pertama lebih efektif dan polariti perasaan berguna.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna fil-kompitu SemEval-2018 12: Komprensjoni tar-raġunament tal-argumenti. Il-kompitu huwa li jintgħa żel il-mandat korrett li jispjega r-raġunament ta’ argument partikolari li jikkonsisti f’talba u raġuni. The main idea of our methods is based on the assumption that the semantic composition of the reason and the warrant should be close to the semantic representation of the corresponding claim.  Aħna nipproponu żewġ mudelli tan-netwerk newrali. L-ewwel wieħed jikkunsidra żewġ kandidati li jiġġustifikaw simultanjament, filwaqt li t-tieni wieħed jipproċessa kull kandidat separatament u mbagħad jagħżel l-aħjar wieħed. Inkorporaw ukoll il-polarità tas-sentimenti billi nassumu li hemm tipi ta’ assoċjazzjonijiet tas-sentimenti bejn ir-raġuni, il-mandat u t-talba. L-esperimenti juru li l-ewwel qafas huwa aktar effettiv u l-polarità tas-sentimenti hija utli.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2018 ജോലിയില്\u200d വിവരിക്കുന്നു ഒരു പ്രത്യേക വാദ്യത്തിന്റെയും ഒരു കാരണത്തിന്റെയും കാരണം ഉള്ള വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്ന ഒരു തര്\u200dക്കിന്റെയും കാര്യത്തിന നമ്മുടെ രീതികളുടെ പ്രധാന ആശയം കാരണത്തിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക് കൂട്ടത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാണെന്ന് കരുതിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വാറന്\u200dറ് പ്രതിര നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഒന്നാമത്തെ രണ്ട് വാറണ്ട് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികളെ ഒരേ സമയത്ത് വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടാമത്തേത് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഓരോ പ്രോസി കാരണത്തിനും വാറണ്ടിനും അവകാശപ്പെടുന്നതിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള വികാരണങ്ങളുണ്ടെന്ന് കരുതിക്കൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d വികാരണത്തിന്റെ  പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ആദ്യത്തെ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്ന', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний системийг SemEval-2018 даалгаварын 12-нд тайлбарладаг: Аргументийн шалтгаан шалтгаан шалтгаан. Үүний даалгавар бол нэг тодорхой аргументын утга болон шалтгааныг тодорхойлох зөв эрх мэдлийг сонгох юм. Бидний аргачлалын гол санаа нь шалтгаан болон эрх мэдлийн семантик бүтэц нь хоорондоо холбоотой утгыг илэрхийлэх хэрэгтэй гэсэн үг юм. Бид хоёр мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварыг санал болгож байна. Эхний нэг нь хоёр удирдагчийг нэг удаа ойлгож, хоёр дахь нь удирдагчид тус тус тус тус тус бүр хамгийн сайн удирдагчийг сонгож байна. Мөн бид сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөл байдлыг шалтгаан, эрх мэдлийн болон эрх мэдлийн хоорондоо олон төрлийн мэдрэмжтэй холбоотой гэж боддог. Эхлээд анхны хэлбэрийг илүү үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system w zadaniu SemEval-2018 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Zadaniem jest wybranie właściwego warunku wyjaśniającego uzasadnienie konkretnego argumentu składającego się z roszczenia i powodu. Główna idea naszych metod opiera się na założeniu, że semantyczny skład przyczyny i gwarantu powinien być zbliżony do semantycznej reprezentacji odpowiedniego twierdzenia. Proponujemy dwa modele sieci neuronowych. Pierwszy rozważa jednocześnie dwóch kandydatów gwarancyjnych, drugi przetwarza każdego kandydata osobno, a następnie wybiera najlepszego. Uwzględniamy również polaryzację sentymentów zakładając, że istnieją rodzaje związków sentymentów między powodem, warunkiem a roszczeniem. Eksperymenty pokazują, że pierwszy framework jest bardziej efektywny, a polaryzacja sentymentów jest użyteczna.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru în sarcina SemEval-2018 12: Înțelegerea argumentelor. Sarcina este de a selecta mandatul corect care explică raționamentul unui anumit argument constând dintr-o pretenție și un motiv. Ideea principală a metodelor noastre se bazează pe presupunerea că compoziția semantică a motivului și a mandatului ar trebui să fie aproape de reprezentarea semantică a revendicării corespunzătoare. Propunem două modele de reţea neurală. Primul ia în considerare simultan doi candidați de mandat, în timp ce al doilea procesează fiecare candidat separat și apoi alege cel mai bun candidat. De asemenea, încorporăm polaritatea sentimentului presupunând că există tipuri de asocieri sentimentale între motiv, mandat și revendicare. Experimentele arată că primul cadru este mai eficient și polaritatea sentimentului este utilă.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt i semiEval-2018 oppgåva 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Oppgåva er å velja den riktige orden som forklarer grunnen av eit bestemt argument som inneheld eit oppgåve og eit grunn. Hovudinnstillinga av metodane våre er basert på assumpsjonen at semantisk samansetting av grunnen og orderen bør vera nær den semantiske representasjonen av den tilsvarande uttalen. Vi foreslår to neuralnettverksmodeller. Den første ser på to garantkandidatar samtidig, mens den andre prosesserer kvar kandidat separe og vel den beste. Vi inkluderer også sentimentpolaritet ved å anta at det finst mange følelsesjonar mellom grunnen, ordenaren og etterspørselen. Eksperimentane viser at det første rammeverket er meir effektivt og sentimentpolaritet er nyttig.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem u zadatku za pola Eval-2018 12: Taj zadatak je izabrati pravu nalog koja objašnjava razum određenog argument a koji se sastoji od tvrdnje i razloga. Glavna ideja naših metoda je bazirana na pretpostavku da je semantički sastav razloga i nalog trebao biti blizu semantičkoj predstavi odgovarajuće tvrdnje. Predlažemo dva modela neuralne mreže. Prvi smatra dva kandidata za nalog istovremeno, a drugi procesira svakog kandidata odvojeno, a zatim odabere najbolju. Takođe uključujemo polarnost sentimenta, pretpostavljajući da postoje vrste osećanja između razloga, naloga i tvrdnje. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je prvi okvir efikasniji i osjećaj polaritet korisniji.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය සම්වෙල්-2018 වැඩ 12 වල විස්තර කරනවා: ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය. වැඩය තමයි විශේෂ සහ හිත හේතුවක් සම්බන්ධයෙන් තියෙන හැකියාවක් තියෙන හැකියාවක් තේරුම් කරන්න හරි වි අපේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරධාන අදහසක් තියෙන්නේ හේතුවේ සෙමැන්ටික් සංවිධානය සහ වාර්න්ට් සම්බන්ධ සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ විධ අපි න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ මොඩේල් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා. පළමුවෙනි කෙනෙක් හිතන්නේ වාර්න්ට් එක්කෙනෙක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න, දෙවෙනි කෙනෙක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප අපි හිතන්නේ හේතුව, වාර්නාන්ට් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා. පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ පලවෙනි පරීක්ෂණය තරම් ප්\u200dරයෝජනවත් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa nidaamka shaqada SemEval-2018 12: Heshiiska heshiiska. The task is to select the correct warrant that explains reasoning of a particular argument consisting of a claim and a reason.  Fikirada ugu muhiimka ah ee qaababkayaga waxaa ku saleysan malaynaya in dhamaanka sababta ah iyo in ogolaanshiyaha uu u dhowaado sharciga ku habboon. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa laba model oo shabakado neuro ah. Mida ugu horreeya ayaa isla markaasna ka fiirsada labo kandidiilo ogolaanshiyeed, marka labaad mid baaraandegaya mid kasta oo kandida ah gooni ahaantiis, kadibna wuxuu dooranayaa mid ugu wanaagsan. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku qeybinaynaa nidaamka, waxaynu u malaynaynaa urur xisaabta ah oo ka dhexeeya sababta, ogolaanshiyaha iyo dacwadda. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in firaaqada ugu horeysa ay ka faa’iido badan tahay islamarkaasna ay faa’iido u leedahay isticmaalka fikrada.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system i SemEval-2018 uppgift 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Uppgiften är att välja rätt fullmakt som förklarar resonemanget av ett visst argument som består av ett anspråk och en orsak. Huvudidén med våra metoder bygger på antagandet att den semantiska sammansättningen av orsaken och ordern bör ligga nära den semantiska representationen av motsvarande anspråk. Vi föreslår två neurala nätverksmodeller. Den första behandlar två kandidater samtidigt, medan den andra behandlar varje kandidat separat och väljer sedan den bästa. Vi införlivar också sentimentpolaritet genom att anta att det finns olika sentimentassociationer mellan orsaken, ordern och anspråket. Experimenten visar att det första ramverket är effektivare och sentimentpolaritet är användbart.', 'ta': 'SemEval-2018 பணியில் எங்கள் அமைப்பை இந்த தாள் விளக்குகிறது: ஆரம்ப ப முடிவு. இந்த செயல் ஒரு கூற்று மற்றும் ஒரு காரணத்தில் உள்ள ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட தருமதிப்பின் காரணத்தை விளக்கும் சரியான வார எங்கள் முறைமைகளின் முக்கிய ய யோசனை பொருத்தமான காரணத்தின் பெம்பென்டிக் உறுப்பு என்று நினைத்து கொண்டது மற்றும் வார்ட்டர் பொரு நாம் இரண்டு நரம்பு வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரிகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். முதலில் இரண்டு வார்ட் தேர்வாளர்களை ஒருமுறை பார்க்கிறார் நாம் உணர்வு தீவிருப்பத்தை சேர்த்து நினைக்கிறோம் காரணத்திற்கும் வாய்ப்பு மற்றும் கூறுதலுக்கும் இடையில் பல வகைய முதல் சட்டத்தில் மிகவும் பயனுள்ளது மற்றும் உணர்வு தீவிரம் பயனுள்ளது.', 'ur': 'This paper describes our system in SemEval-2018 task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. یہ کام صرف ٹھیک واورند کا انتخاب کرنا ہے جو ایک مخصوص حجت کی دلیل بیان کرتا ہے جس میں ایک واضح اور دلیل ہے ہمارے طریقوں کی اصلی ایڈیوں پر بنیاد ہے کہ دلیل کی سیمانٹی پیدائش اور حکمت کی تعبیر کی سیمانٹی پیدائش کے قریب ہونا چاہیے۔ ہم دو نیورال نیٹ ورک موڈل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ پہلی شخص دو واورینٹ کینڈیٹوں کو ایک ہی سمجھتا ہے، اور دوسری شخص ہر کانڈیٹ کو مختلف طریقے سے پیدا کرتا ہے اور پھر بہترین انتخاب کرتا ہے. اور ہم نے احساسات آہستگی میں شامل کیا ہے اس کے مطابق کہ دلیل، حکمت اور ادعات کے درمیان بہت سی احساسات ہیں آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ پہلی چوکاٹ بہت اثر ہے اور احساسات آلودگی مفید ہے.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval-2018 vazifaning tizimimizni 12: Argument Reading Completion. Bu vazifa taqdimot va sabablarga ega bo'lgan buyruq haqiqiqiy huquqlarni tanlash mumkin. Bizning usullamizning asosiy fikri sabablar uchun semantik tuzilishi asosida, va ruxsat qo'shilgan davomida semantik represent bo'lishi kerak. Biz ikkita neyrol tarmoq modellarini rivojlanamiz. Birinchi marta ikki vaqt va birinchi vazifa birinchi vazifa bir vazifa alohida harakat qiladi va keyin eng eng eng yaxshi narsa tanlanadi. We also incorporate sentiment polarity by assuming that there are kinds of sentiment associations between the reason, the warrant and the claim.  Sinovlar birinchi freym juda foydalanishi va hissiyotni foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống của chúng ta trong nhiệm vụ SemEvol-208: Hoàn toàn biện luận. Nhiệm vụ là chọn ra trát chính xác giải thích lý do lập luận về một chủ đề cụ thể gồm một yêu cầu và một lý do. Nguyên nhân chủ yếu của phương pháp của chúng ta dựa trên giả thuyết rằng cấu trúc theo ngữ pháp của lí do và trát nên gần gũi với cách mô tả ngữ pháp của yêu cầu tương ứng. Chúng tôi đề xuất hai mô hình mạng thần kinh. Người đầu tiên xem xét hai tiến sĩ cùng một lúc, trong khi người thứ hai xử lý mỗi ứng viên riêng và chọn người tốt nhất. Chúng tôi cũng có những quan điểm tình cảm khác nhau khi cho rằng có những mối quan hệ tình cảm giữa lí do, trát bắt và yêu cầu. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy khung hình đầu tiên hiệu quả hơn và quan điểm tình cảm có ích.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата система в задача 12: Разбиране на аргументите. Задачата е да изберете правилната гаранция, която обяснява мотивите на конкретен аргумент, състоящ се от претенция и причина. Основната идея на нашите методи се основава на предположението, че семантичният състав на причината и гаранцията трябва да са близо до семантичното представяне на съответната претенция. Предлагаме два модела на невронна мрежа. Първият разглежда двама кандидати едновременно, докато вторият обработва всеки кандидат отделно и след това избира най-добрия. Също така включваме сантиментална полярност, като приемаме, че има видове сантиментални асоциации между причината, заповедта и претенцията. Експериментите показват, че първата рамка е по-ефективна и полярността на сантимента е полезна.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft ons systeem in SemEval-2018 taak 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. De taak is om de juiste warrant te selecteren die de redenering verklaart van een bepaald argument bestaande uit een claim en een reden. Het hoofdidee van onze methoden is gebaseerd op de veronderstelling dat de semantische samenstelling van de rede en de warrant dicht bij de semantische representatie van de overeenkomstige claim moet zijn. We stellen twee neurale netwerkmodellen voor. De eerste beschouwt twee warrantkandidaten tegelijk, terwijl de tweede elke kandidaat afzonderlijk verwerkt en vervolgens de beste kiest. We integreren ook sentimentpolariteit door ervan uit te gaan dat er soorten sentimentassociaties bestaan tussen de reden, de warrant en de claim. De experimenten tonen aan dat het eerste framework effectiever is en sentimentpolariteit nuttig is.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system i SemEval-2018 opgave 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Opgaven er at vælge den korrekte kendelse, der forklarer begrundelsen for et bestemt argument bestående af et krav og en grund. Hovedideen i vores metoder er baseret på den antagelse, at den semantiske sammensætning af årsagen og kendelsen bør være tæt på den semantiske repræsentation af det tilsvarende krav. Vi foreslår to neurale netværksmodeller. Den første betragter to warrant kandidater samtidigt, mens den anden behandler hver kandidat separat og derefter vælger den bedste. Vi indarbejder også sentimentpolaritet ved at antage, at der er slags sentimentforbindelser mellem årsagen, kendelsen og kravet. Eksperimenterne viser, at den første ramme er mere effektiv og sentimentpolaritet er nyttig.', 'hr': 'Ovaj novinar opisuje naš sustav u zadatku u polu Eval-2018 12: Taj zadatak je izabrati pravu nalog koji objašnjava razum određenog argument a koji se sastoji od zahtjeva i razloga. Glavna ideja naših metoda je temeljena na pretpostavki da je semantički sastav razloga i nalog trebao biti blizu semantičkoj predstavi odgovarajuće tvrdnje. Predlažemo dva modela neuralne mreže. Prvi smatra dvije kandidate za nalog istodobno, a drugi procesira svakog kandidata odvojeno, a zatim odabere najbolju. Također uključujemo polarnost osjećaja pretpostavljajući da postoje vrste osjećajnih udruženja između razloga, naloga i zahtjeva. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je prvi okvir učinkovitiji i osjećaj polaritet korisniji.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser System in SemEval-2018 Aufgabe 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Die Aufgabe besteht darin, den richtigen Warrant auszuwählen, der die Begründung eines bestimmten Arguments, bestehend aus einem Anspruch und einem Grund, erklärt. Der Grundgedanke unserer Methoden beruht auf der Annahme, dass die semantische Zusammensetzung der Vernunft und des Warrants nah an der semantischen Darstellung des entsprechenden Anspruchs liegen sollte. Wir schlagen zwei neuronale Netzwerkmodelle vor. Der erste berücksichtigt zwei Warrant Kandidaten gleichzeitig, während der zweite jeden Kandidaten separat bearbeitet und dann den besten auswählt. Wir berücksichtigen auch Sentiment Polarität, indem wir annehmen, dass es Arten von Sentiment Assoziationen zwischen dem Grund, dem Warrant und dem Anspruch gibt. Die Experimente zeigen, dass das erste Framework effektiver ist und Sentiment Polarität nützlich ist.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-18임무12: 논증 추리 이해에서 우리의 시스템을 묘사하였다.임무는 클레임과 이유로 구성된 특정 논점의 추리를 정확한 보증서를 선택하는 것이다.우리의 방법의 주요 사상은 이러한 가설을 바탕으로 한다. 즉, 이유와 주주권 취득증의 의미 구성은 상응하는 권리가 요구하는 의미 표시에 가까워야 한다는 것이다.우리는 두 가지 신경 네트워크 모델을 제기했다.첫 번째 방법은 두 개의 후보 자격을 동시에 고려하고 두 번째 방법은 각각 후보 자격을 처리한 다음에 가장 좋은 후보 자격을 선택한다.우리는 또한 이유 가설, 주주권 취득증과 클레임 사이에 각종 정서적 관련이 존재한다는 것을 통해 정서의 극성을 그 안에 포함시켰다.실험에 의하면 첫 번째 틀이 더욱 효과적이고 감정의 극성이 더욱 유용하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را توصیف می\u200cکند که در عملیات نیم Eval-2018 ۱۲: تأکید دلایل ارجментی است. وظیفه این است که حکومت درستی را انتخاب کنید که دلیل یک حکومت خاص را توضیح می دهد که از یک ادعا و دلیل است. ایده اصلی از روش\u200cهای ما بر اساس فرض است که ساختمان semantic of the reason and the warrant should be close to the semantic representation of the corresponding claim. ما دو مدل شبکه عصبی پیشنهاد می کنیم. اولین نفر دو کاندیدای مجوز را به همزمان فکر می\u200cکند، در حالی که دومین نفر هر کاندیدای را جدا جدا می\u200cکند و سپس بهترین نفر را انتخاب می\u200cکند. ما همچنین قطعیت احساسات را با فرض کردن که بین دلیل، حکم و ادعا، یک جور ترکیب احساسات وجود دارد. آزمایشات نشان می دهند که اولین چهارچوب موثر تر است و قطعیت احساسات مفید تر است.', 'sw': 'This paper describes our system in SemEval-2018 task 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension.  Kazi hiyo ni kuchagua kitendo sahihi kinachoelezea sababu ya hoja maalum inayojumuisha madai na sababu. Wazo kuu la mbinu zetu lina msingi wa dhana kwamba ujengenezaji wa kimapenzi wa sababu na hatia hiyo inapaswa kuwa karibu na uwakilishi wa kimapenzi wa madai yanayojibu. Tunazipendekeza mifano miwili ya mtandao wa neurali. Kila kwanza kinachukulia wagombea wawili wa vita kwa wakati mmoja, wakati mchakato wa pili unafanya mgombea mmoja kwa upande mmoja na baadae anachagua moja bora zaidi. Pia tunajumuisha hisia za uchaguzi kwa kudhani kuwa kuna aina mbalimbali za hisia kati ya sababu, warrant na madai. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wa kwanza umekuwa na ufanisi zaidi na utaratibu wa uchaguzi unafaa.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem kita dalam SemEval-2018 tugas 12: Argumen Memahami. Tugas adalah memilih surat perintah yang benar yang menjelaskan alasan dari argumen tertentu yang terdiri dari klaim dan alasan. Ide utama dari metode kita berdasarkan asumsi bahwa komposisi semantis alasan dan surat perintah seharusnya dekat dengan representation semantis dari klaim yang sama. Kami mengusulkan dua model jaringan saraf. Yang pertama mempertimbangkan dua kandidat surat perintah bersamaan, sementara yang kedua memproses setiap kandidat secara terpisah dan kemudian memilih yang terbaik. Kami juga memasukkan polaritas sentimen dengan menganggap bahwa ada jenis asosiasi sentimen antara alasan, surat perintah dan klaim. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa rangkaian pertama lebih efektif dan polaritas sentimen berguna.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin tonë në detyrën SemEval-2018 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Detyra është të zgjedhësh mandatin e saktë që shpjegon arsyetimin e një argumenti të veçantë që përbëhet nga një pretendim dhe një arsye. Ideja kryesore e metodave tona është bazuar në supozimin se përbërja semantike e arsyes dhe mandatit duhet të jetë afër përfaqësimit semantik të pretendimit korrespondent. Ne propozojmë dy modele rrjeti nervor. I pari konsideron dy kandidatë të mandatit në të njëjtën kohë, ndërsa i dyti proceson secilin kandidat në mënyrë të veçantë dhe pastaj zgjedh më të mirën. Ne përfshijmë gjithashtu polaritetin e ndjenjave duke supozuar se ka lloje shoqërimi të ndjenjave midis arsyes, urdhërit dhe pretendimit. Eksperimentet tregojnë se kuadri i parë është më efektiv dhe polariteti i ndjenjave është i dobishëm.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz sistemimizi SemEval-2018 görevi 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension'da tanaýar. Görev şu ýagdaý we sebäbi bolan bir argümiň razylygyny düşündirip dogry garaýyşy saýlamak. Bizim metodlarymyzyň esasy fikri semantik bilen sebebinin ve garanti gerekli iddialerin semantik bilen yaklaşması gerektiğini tahmin ediyor. Biz nuýral net nuýdanlary teklip edýäris. Ilkinji adam iki sany tarapyndan bir gezek pikir edýär, ikinjisi hem tarapyndan her tarapyny aýrylşykdan soňra iň gowy tarapyny saýlaýar. Biz hem duýgulary polaritet bilen sebäbi, garanti we iddialyk arasynda cäreler duýgulary bar diýip pikir edelim. Deneyler ilkinji çerýük etkinlik we duýgular polaritetdygyny görkezýärler.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ስብሰባችንን በSemEval-2018 ስራ 12 ላይ ይናገራል፤ የአርጉም አካባቢ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ ስራው የእውነቱ ትክክለኛውን ፍርድ መምረጥ ነው፣ የተለየ ክርክሩ እና ምክንያት መሆኑን የሚያብራራ ነው፡፡ የሥርዓታችን መጀመሪያ አሳብ የምክንያት ሰሜንቲካዊ አካባቢ እና የተፈቃዱ የአስተናጋሪው ጥያቄ እንዲቀረብ ነው፡፡ ሁለትን የኔዌብ መረብ ምሳሌዎችን እናሳልጋለን ። አንደኛው ሁለት ዋራጅ የሚቆጠሩ ተቃዋሚዎች በአንድ ሰዓት እና ሁለተኛው ተቃውሞ እያንዳንዱ የሚራዳውን ለብቻው ይምረጡታል፡፡ እናም የስሜት ርኵሰት፣ ምክንያት፣ ፍርድ እና ጥያቄ መካከል ልዩ ዓይነት የስሜት ጉዳዮች እንዳሉ እናስባለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች የመጀመሪያው ፍሬም የበለጠ ጥያቄ እና የስሜት ጥያቄ ጥቅም ነው፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel in SemEval-2018 taak 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Die taak is om die korrekte waarmee te kies wat verduidelik redening van 'n bepaalde argument wat bestaan van' n aanvrag en 'n rede. Die hoofde idee van ons metodes is gebaseer op die aanvaar dat die semantiese opsameling van die rede en die waardeel moet naby wees aan die semantiese versameling van die ooreenstemmende aandrukking. Ons voorstel twee neuralnetwerk modele. Die eerste ondersteun twee waarskuwingkandidate eenmaal, terwyl die tweede een prosesseer elke kandidate apart en dan kies die beste een. Ons inkorporeer ook sentiment polariteit deur te aanvaar dat daar is soorte sentimente assosiasies tussen die rede, die waardeel en die aandrukking. Die eksperimente wys dat die eerste raamwerk meer effektief is en sentimente polariteit is nuttig.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt sistemimizi SemEval-2018 işində 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Gözəl həqiqəti seçməkdir ki, bir iddiadan və bir səbəbdən olan müəyyən bir argumentin razılığını a çıqlayır. Bizim metodlarımızın ən böyük fikri səbəbinin semantik kompozisyonun və əmrinin müəyyən edilən iddianın semantik göstərilməsinin yaxınlığına dayanılmasına dayanılır. Biz iki nöral ağ modeli təklif edirik. İlk kişi bir-birinə iki warrant kandidatını düşünür, ikincisi isə hər kandidat ayrı-ayrı işləyir və sonra ən yaxşısını seçir. Biz həmçinin hisslərin polaritəsini həmçinin səbəbi, hökmü və iddiası arasında hisslərin bir çeşit bağlılığı olduğunu düşünürük. İlk çerçive daha etkilidir və hisslərin polarisi faydalıdır.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգը 2018-ի "ՍեմԷվալ-2018" առաջադրանքում 12. Հարտադրությունն այն է, որ ընտրենք ճիշտ պատվիրանը, որը բացատրում է որոշակի բանավեճի պատճառը, որը կազմում է պնդում և պատճառ: Մեր մեթոդների հիմնական գաղափարը հիմնված է այն ենթադրության վրա, որ պատճառի սեմանտիկ բաղադրությունը և պատվիրանը պետք է մոտ լինեն համապատասխանի փաստարկության սեմանտիկ ներկայացումին: We propose two neural network models.  Առաջինը հաշվի առնում է երկու թեկնածուներ միաժամանակ, մինչդեռ երկրորդը յուրաքանչյուր թեկնածուն առանձին գործում է և հետո ընտրում է լավագույնը: Մենք նաև ներառում ենք զգացմունքների հյուսիսականությունը ենթադրելով, որ կան զգացմունքների կապեր պատճառի, պատվիրանի և փաստարկման միջև: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջին շրջանակը ավելի արդյունավետ է, իսկ զգացմունքների հյուսիսականությունը օգտակար է:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৮ কাজের ১২: আর্গুমেন্ট পুনরুদ্ধার করছে। এই কাজ হচ্ছে সঠিক ওয়ারেন্ট নির্বাচন করা যায় যে দাবি এবং কারণের মধ্যে একটি বিশেষ যুক্তির কারণ ব্যাখ্যা করে। আমাদের পদ্ধতির প্রধান ধারণা এই ধারণার উপর ভিত্তি করেছে যে কারণের সেম্পেন্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং সংশ্লিষ্ট দাবীর সেমেন্টিক প্রতিনিধিত We propose two neural network models.  প্রথমে দুই ওয়ারান্ট প্রার্থী একই সাথে বিবেচনা করে, আর দ্বিতীয় প্রার্থীরা প্রত্যেক প্রার্থীকে আলাদা করে বেছে নেয় এবং তা আমরা অনুভূতির সাথে অনুভূতির সাথে যুক্ত করি যে কারণ, ওয়ারেন্ট এবং দাবীর মধ্যে অনেক ধরনের অনুভূতি সংগঠন রয়েছে। এই পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রথম ফ্রেমের কার্যক্রম বেশী কার্যকর এবং আবেগের দূরীতিতে কার্যকর।', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema a SemEval-2018 tasca 12: Comprensió de raonament d'arguments. La tasca és seleccionar la orden correct a que explici el raonament d'un argument concret que consisteix en una reclamació i una raó. La idea principal dels nostres mètodes es basa en la suposició que la composició semàntica de la raó i la mandat hauria d'estar a prop de la representació semàntica de la reclamació correspondent. Proposem dos models de xarxa neural. El primer considera dos candidats amb mandat simultàniament, mentre el segon processa cada candidat separadament i aleshores escolli el millor. També incorporam la polaritat sentimental suposant que hi ha tipus d'associacions sentimentals entre la raó, la mandat i la reclamació. Els experiments demostren que el primer marc és més efectiu i que la polaritat sentimental és útil.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém v SemEval-2018 úkolu 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Úkolem je vybrat správný příkaz, který vysvětluje odůvodnění konkrétního argumentu sestávajícího z nároku a důvodu. Hlavní myšlenka našich metod je založena na předpokladu, že sémantické složení důvodu a zaručení by mělo být blízko sémantické reprezentaci odpovídajícího tvrzení. Navrhujeme dva modely neuronových sítí. První zvažuje dva kandidáty současně, druhý zpracovává každého kandidáta zvlášť a pak vybere nejlepšího. Rovněž zahrnujeme polaritu sentimentů tím, že předpokládáme, že existují druhy souvislostí sentimentů mezi důvodem, zaručením a nárokem. Experimenty ukazují, že první rámec je efektivnější a sentimentní polarita je užitečná.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi SemEval-2018 ülesandes 12: Argumenti mõistmise arusaam. Ülesanne on valida õige garantii, mis selgitab konkreetse väite põhjendust, mis koosneb nõudest ja põhjusest. Meie meetodite peamine idee põhineb eeldusel, et põhjuse ja orderi semantiline koostis peaks olema lähedal vastava väite semantilisele esitusele. Pakume välja kaks närvivõrgu mudelit. Esimene käsitleb kahte orderi kandidaati samaaegselt, teine menetleb iga kandidaati eraldi ja valib seejärel parima. Lisame ka sentimentaalse polaarsuse, eeldades, et põhjuse, orderi ja nõude vahel on mingisuguseid sentimentaalseid seoseid. Eksperimentid näitavad, et esimene raamistik on efektiivsem ja sentimentaalne polaarsus on kasulik.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem u zadatku u polu Eval-2018 12: Taj zadatak je izabrati pravu nalog koji objašnjava razum određenog argument a koji se sastoji od tvrdnje i razloga. Glavna ideja naših metoda je bazirana na pretpostavku da je semantički sastav razloga i nalog trebao biti blizu semantičkoj predstavi odgovarajuće tvrdnje. Predlažemo dva modela neuralne mreže. Prvi smatra dvije kandidate za nalog istovremeno, dok drugi procesira svakog kandidata odvojeno i onda bira najbolje. Također uključujemo polarnost osjećaja pretpostavljajući da postoje vrste osjećajnih udruženja između razloga, naloga i tvrdnje. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je prvi okvir efikasniji i osjećaj polaritet korisniji.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmäämme SemEval-2018 tehtävässä 12: Argument Reasoning Comprehension. Tehtävänä on valita oikea peruste, joka selittää tietyn väitteen perustelut, jotka koostuvat vaatimuksesta ja syystä. Menetelmiemme pääajatus perustuu oletukseen, että syyn semanttisen koostumuksen ja oikeutuksen tulisi olla lähellä vastaavan väitteen semanttista esitystä. Ehdotamme kahta neuroverkkomallia. Ensimmäinen käsittelee kahta warranttiehdokasta samanaikaisesti, toinen käsittelee jokaisen ehdokkaan erikseen ja valitsee sitten parhaan. Sisällytämme myös tunteiden polariteetin olettamalla, että syyn, määräyksen ja vaatimuksen välillä on jonkinlaisia tunteiden välisiä yhteyksiä. Kokeet osoittavat, että ensimmäinen kehys on tehokkaampi ja tunteiden polariteetti on hyödyllinen.', 'jv': 'This paper describs we System in semi-2008 task 12: argument Regons Comprering task is to select the right justification Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem punika dipunaké ning sampek semanti kuwi nggawe rasané karo awak dhéwé kuwi mau kudu ampuhé sematik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerasah model sing dibutuhke alat. Awak dhéwé sing beraksi kabèh sabên-sabên ning acak dhéwé, sampeyan kabèh sing beraksi sabên-sabên winih sabên-sabên lan tambah apik dhéwé uga sing luwih sabên. Awak dhéwé éntuk angkang polarity sing dipulangan kelamèh karo perusahaan karo perusahaan kelamèh karo perusahaan kuwi tindakan, awak dhéwé karo perusahaan winih. Awak dhéwé éntuk wong iki banget tualke luwih apik lan kesempatan polarity sing apik.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem v nalogi 12 SemEval-2018: Razumevanje utemeljitve argumentov. Naloga je izbrati pravilen nalog, ki pojasnjuje obrazložitev določenega argumenta, sestavljenega iz zahtevka in razloga. Glavna ideja naših metod temelji na predpostavki, da bi morala biti semantična sestava razloga in naloga blizu semantične reprezentacije ustrezne trditve. Predlagamo dva modela nevronskega omrežja. Prvi obravnava dva kandidata sočasno, drugi pa posebej obravnava vsakega kandidata in nato izbere najboljšega. Prav tako vključujemo sentimentalno polarnost tako, da predpostavljamo, da obstajajo vrste sentimentalnih povezav med razlogom, nalogom in trditvijo. Poskusi kažejo, da je prvi okvir učinkovitejši in da je sentimentalna polarnost koristna.', 'ha': "Bu takardan na bayyana na'urarmu a cikin aikin SemEV-2018 12: Argument Leading Completion. The task is to select the correct warrant that explains reasoning of a particular argument consisting of a claim and a reason.  Maɓan idãnar hanyoyinmu ne a kan da za'a yi zato da ni'anar kashi na saba da kuma ruwan ya kamata a kusa ya zama makõmar da mataimaki. Tuna goyya da misãlai biyu na'urar. Ga ta farkon, ana gane kandida biyu a yi sau da shi, kuma gudan na tafiyar kõwane kandida da kewaye, sa'an nan kuma ya zãɓi mafi kyaun wanda ya fi girma. Kayya, Munã shigar da wata hisia da za'a samu da wasu mataimaki na hisia a tsakanin saba, da ruwan da aka faɗa. Tafiyar da ke nuna cewa, firam na farkon yana da mafiya amfani, kuma ma'abũcin haske na da amfani.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་འདི་ལ་(SemEval-2018)ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་༡༢་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པ། The task is to select the correct warrant that explains reasoning of a particular argument consisting of a claim and a reason. The main idea of our methods is based on the assumption that the semantic composition of the reason and the warrant should be close to the semantic representation of the corresponding claim. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་དྲ་རྒྱ་མི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གཉིས་བ་བསམ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དེ་རེད། སྔོན་པ་དེ་ནི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལེན་གཉིས་གཅིག་པར་བསམ་བྱེད། ཟླ་བ་གཉིས་པ་སོ་སོ་སོ་སོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རེད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་དང་། བསམ་བློ་རྣམས་ལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་སྒྲིག་ཚོར་བ་ཡིན་པ་དང་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། experiments show that the first framework is more effective and sentiment polarity is useful.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו במשימה SemEval-2018 12: The task is to select the correct warrant that explains reasoning of a particular argument consisting of a claim and a reason.  הרעיון העיקרי של השיטות שלנו מבוסס על ההנחה שהמייצג הסמנטי של הסיבה והצו צריך להיות קרוב לייצג הסמנטי של הטענה המתאימה. אנחנו מציעים שני דוגמנים לרשת העצבית. הראשון שוקל שני מועמדים על צו באותו זמן, בעוד השני מעבד כל מועמד בנפרד ואז בוחר את הטוב ביותר. We also incorporate sentiment polarity by assuming that there are kinds of sentiment associations between the reason, the warrant and the claim.  The experiments show that the first framework is more effective and sentiment polarity is useful.'}
{'en': 'Resolving Event Coreference with Supervised Representation Learning and Clustering-Oriented Regularization', 'ar': 'حل حدث Coreference من خلال التعلم التمثيلي الخاضع للإشراف والتنظيم الموجه نحو المجموعات', 'es': 'Resolución de la correferencia de eventos con aprendizaje de representación supervisada y regularización orientada a agrupamiento', 'fr': "Résolution de la coréférence d'événements avec l'apprentissage de la représentation supervisée et la régularisation axée sur le regroupement", 'pt': 'Resolvendo a Correferência de Eventos com Aprendizado de Representação Supervisionada e Regularização Orientada a Clustering', 'ja': '監督された表現学習とクラスタリング指向の正規化でイベントコアリファレンスを解決する', 'zh': '用监示学向聚类正则化事协同', 'ru': 'Решение ядра событий с контролируемым обучением представлению и кластеризацией-ориентированной регуляризацией', 'hi': 'पर्यवेक्षित प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने और क्लस्टरिंग-उन्मुख नियमितीकरण के साथ ईवेंट कोरेफेरेंस को हल करना', 'ga': 'Croílár Imeachta a Réiteach le Foghlaim faoi Ionadaíocht Mhaoirseachta agus Rialáil atá Dírithe ar Chnuasaigh', 'ka': 'მოვლენების შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებლობელი რეგილარიზაციის შესაძლებლობა', 'hu': 'Eseménykorreferencia megoldása felügyelt képviseleti tanulással és klasztereorientált szabályozással', 'el': 'Επίλυση της Συνδιάσκεψης Εκδηλώσεων με Επίβλεψη Εκπροσώπησης Μάθηση και Συγκεντρωμένη Ρυθμοποίηση', 'mk': 'Решење на соодветноста на настаните со набљудуваното учење на претставништвото и регуларизација ориентирана на групирање', 'it': 'Risolvere la coreferenza degli eventi con apprendimento della rappresentanza supervisionata e regolarizzazione orientata al cluster', 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į stebėtą atstovybę ir į klasifikavimą orientuoto mokymosi ir reguliavimo klausimų suderinamumo sprendimas', 'kk': 'Оқиғаларды бақылап көрсетілген кескіндердің оқиғаларын оқыту және кластерлерді бағыттау үлгілерімен шешу', 'ms': 'Menyelesaikan Kesempatan Peristiwa dengan Pembelajaran Perwakilan Dipengawasi dan Pengaturan Berorientasi-Berkumpulan', 'ml': 'പ്രതിനിധി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും ക്ലൌസ്ട്രിങ്ങിന്റെ നിയമങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതും കൊണ്ട് അവസ്ഥ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് പരിഹ', 'mt': 'Resolving Event Coreference with Supervised Representation Learning and Clustering-Oriented Regularization', 'no': 'Å løysa hendingshovudlighet med overvåka representasjonslæring og klasteringsorientert regulering', 'pl': 'Rozwiązywanie współpracy zdarzeń z uczeniem się nadzorowanej reprezentacji i regularyzacją zorientowaną na klastry', 'ro': 'Rezolvarea corefenței evenimentelor cu învățare de reprezentare supravegheată și reglementare orientată spre clustering', 'si': 'නිරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ඉගෙනගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා අවස්ථානය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විසඳන්න', 'sr': 'Rešavanje odgovarajuće događaja sa nadzornim predstavljanjem učenje i regularizacijom klasteriranja', 'so': 'Qoraalka dhacdooyinka ee la xiriira barbaarinta iyo Clustering-oriented Regularization', 'sv': 'Lösa händelseCoreferens med övervakad representation lärande och klusteriorienterad reglering', 'ur': 'مواظب نمایش کی تعلیم اور کلاسترینگ-Oriented Regularization کے ساتھ حادثہ کی رضامندی حل کرنے والی', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн суралцах болон Клустерингийн ориентиролтын Үзэсгэлэнтэй Хэрэглэгч Үзэсгэлэнтэй', 'ta': 'பார்க்கப்பட்ட குறிப்புகள் கற்றுக்கொண்டு நிகழ்வு முறைமையை முடிக்கிறது மற்றும் மேல்மீட்டு செல்லும் விதிம', 'uz': 'Resolving Event Coreference with Supervised Representation Learning and Clustering-Oriented Regularization', 'vi': 'Kết thúc cuộc họp quốc phòng với giám sát giáo dục giáo dục giáo dục', 'bg': 'Решаване на кореференция на събития с контролирано представителство обучение и регулиране, ориентирано към клъстери', 'hr': 'Rešavanje odgovarajuće događaja s nadzornim predstavljanjem učenje i regularizacijom iz klasteriranja', 'nl': 'Het oplossen van gebeurteniscoreferenz met supervised representation learning en clustering-georiënteerde regularisatie', 'da': 'Løsning af begivenhedskoreference med overvåget repræsentationslæring og klyngeorienteret regulering', 'id': 'Menyelesaikan Kesempatan Kejadian dengan Perwakilan Dipengawasi Belajar dan Regularisasi Orientasi-Clustering', 'fa': 'حل کنترل اتفاقی با یادگیری و قانونی\u200cسازی از نماینده\u200cهای مراقبت', 'ko': '감독을 바탕으로 학습과 분류 정규화된 사건의 공통된 해소를 나타낸다', 'de': 'Lösung von Event Coreferenz mit überwachtem Repräsentationslernen und clusterorientierter Regularisierung', 'af': 'Oplos gebeurtenis voorkeure met ondersoekte voorstelling Leer en Klastering-Orienteerde Regulisering', 'sw': 'Kusuluhisha Mkutano wa Tukio na Utawala wa Kujifunza na Kufungua', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e korreferencës së ngjarjeve me mësimin e përfaqësimit të mbikqyrur dhe rregullimin e orientuar në grupimin', 'hy': 'Կարևորում է իրադարձությունների համապատասխանությունը վերահսկված ներկայացուցման ուսումնասիրության և խմբագրման ուղղությամբ', 'az': '䟃뙺泉駅齤楲楬浩얟⁒数牥獥湴慴楶攠쎶祲즙湭즙獩⁶즙⁃汵獴敲楮札佲楥湴敤⁒敧畬慲楺慳祯渊', 'bn': 'সুপারভিস্ট প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা এবং ক্লাস্টারিং-অর্থিত নিয়মিতকরণের সাথে ইভেন্ট কোরিফেন্স সমাধান করা হচ্ছে', 'tr': 'Görkezilen Wasp Görkezilişi öwrenmek we Clustering-Gürekli Regularizasy bilen çözilýär', 'cs': 'Řešení společné události s dohledem nad reprezentací učením a klastrováním orientovanou regularizací', 'bs': 'Rešavanje odgovarajuće događaja sa nadzornim predstavljanjem učenje i regularizacijom iz klasteriranja', 'et': 'Sündmuste koostöö lahendamine juhitava esindusõppe ja klastritele orienteeritud regulariseerimisega', 'ca': 'Resolving Event Coreference with Supervised Representation Learning and Clustering-Oriented Regularisation', 'fi': 'Tapahtumakorferenssin ratkaiseminen valvotun edustuksen oppimisen ja klusteroinnin avulla', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'לפתור שידור אירועים עם לימוד מייצגה מושלמת ומורגנציה ממוקדת', 'sk': 'Reševanje korference dogodkov z nadzorovanim učenjem predstavništva in ureditvijo, usmerjeno v grozde', 'jv': 'Resolve events', 'bo': 'བྱ་འགུལ་གཙོ་བོ་ལ་རྟོགས་པའི་བསྡུས་སྙན་པའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་དང་འཛིན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ'}
{'en': 'We present an approach to event coreference resolution by developing a general framework for clustering that uses supervised representation learning. We propose a neural network architecture with novel Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) terms in the objective function. These terms encourage the model to create embeddings of event mentions that are amenable to clustering. We then use agglomerative clustering on these embeddings to build event coreference chains. For both within- and cross-document coreference on the ECB+ corpus, our model obtains better results than models that require significantly more pre-annotated information. This work provides insight and motivating results for a new general approach to solving coreference and clustering problems with representation learning.', 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque para la resolución de correferencias de eventos mediante el desarrollo de un marco general para la agrupación que utiliza el aprendizaje de representación supervisada. Proponemos una arquitectura de red neuronal con términos novedosos de Regularización Orientada a Agrupamientos (CORE) en la función objetivo. Estos términos alientan al modelo a crear incorporaciones de menciones de eventos que sean susceptibles de agrupamiento. A continuación, utilizamos la agrupación aglomerativa en estas incrustaciones para crear cadenas de correferencia de eventos. Para la correferencia dentro y entre documentos en el corpus ECB+, nuestro modelo obtiene mejores resultados que los modelos que requieren una cantidad significativamente mayor de información previamente anotada. Este trabajo proporciona información y resultados motivadores para un nuevo enfoque general para resolver problemas de correferencia y agrupamiento con el aprendizaje de representación.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem para resolução de correferência de eventos desenvolvendo uma estrutura geral para agrupamento que usa aprendizado de representação supervisionado. Propomos uma arquitetura de rede neural com novos termos de Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) na função objetivo. Esses termos incentivam o modelo a criar embeddings de menções de eventos que são passíveis de agrupamento. Em seguida, usamos clustering aglomerativo nesses embeddings para construir cadeias de correferência de eventos. Para a correferência dentro e entre documentos no corpus ECB+, nosso modelo obtém melhores resultados do que os modelos que exigem significativamente mais informações pré-anotadas. Este trabalho fornece insights e resultados motivadores para uma nova abordagem geral para resolver problemas de correferência e agrupamento com aprendizado de representação.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche de résolution de coréférence d'événements en développant un cadre général pour le clustering qui utilise l'apprentissage par représentation supervisée. Nous proposons une architecture de réseau de neurones avec de nouveaux termes de régularisation orientée cluster (CORE) dans la fonction objectif. Ces termes encouragent le modèle à créer des intégrations de mentions d'événements pouvant être regroupées. Nous utilisons ensuite le clustering agglomératif sur ces intégrations pour créer des chaînes de coréférence d'événements. Pour la coréférence à l'intérieur et entre documents sur le corpus ECB+, notre modèle obtient de meilleurs résultats que les modèles qui nécessitent beaucoup plus d'informations pré-annotées. Ce travail fournit des informations et des résultats motivants pour une nouvelle approche générale de la résolution des problèmes de coréférence et de regroupement dans le cadre de l'apprentissage par représentation.", 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا لقرار مرجعية الأحداث من خلال تطوير إطار عام للتجميع يستخدم التعلم التمثيلي الخاضع للإشراف. نقترح بنية شبكة عصبية بشروط جديدة لتنظيم المجموعات (CORE) في الوظيفة الموضوعية. تشجع هذه المصطلحات النموذج على إنشاء حفلات زفاف مذكورة في الأحداث قابلة للتجميع. ثم نستخدم التجمعات التراكمية على حفلات الزفاف هذه لبناء سلاسل مرجعية للحدث. لكل من المرجع داخل المستند وعبر المستندات على مجموعة ECB + ، يحصل نموذجنا على نتائج أفضل من النماذج التي تتطلب معلومات مشروحة مسبقًا أكثر بشكل ملحوظ. يوفر هذا العمل رؤية ونتائج تحفيزية لنهج عام جديد لحل المشكلات المرجعية وتجميعها مع التعلم التمثيلي.', 'ja': '監督下での表現学習を用いたクラスタリングのための一般的な枠組みを開発することにより、事象コアレファレンス解決へのアプローチを提示する。客観的な機能に新規のクラスタリング指向正則化（ CORE ）用語を用いたニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを提案する。これらの用語は、モデルがクラスタリングに適したイベントメンションの埋め込みを作成することを奨励します。そして、これらの埋め込みに集積クラスタリングを使用して、イベントコアレフィエンスチェーンを構築します。ECB +コーパスの文書内およびクロスドキュメントコアレファレンスの両方で、当社のモデルは、事前に注釈された情報を大幅に必要とするモデルよりも優れた結果を得ることができます。この研究は、表現学習でコアレフィケーションとクラスタリングの問題を解決する新しい一般的なアプローチのための洞察と動機づけの結果を提供します。', 'zh': '开监示学者聚类通用框架,发一事协解之。 吾发一神经网络架构,函数有新聚类之正则化(CORE)。 此术语劝模形创合聚类事及嵌嵌。 然后,我们对这些嵌合聚类来构建事情共推理。 ECB+ 语料库上之文档,与跨文档共推理,先注信息者也。 此所以为学者共指与聚类之所以激劝也。', 'hi': 'हम पर्यवेक्षित प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने का उपयोग करता है कि clustering के लिए एक सामान्य रूपरेखा विकसित करके घटना coreference संकल्प के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम उद्देश्य समारोह में उपन्यास Clustering-उन्मुख नियमितीकरण (कोर) शब्दों के साथ एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। ये शर्तें मॉडल को ईवेंट उल्लेखों के एम्बेडिंग बनाने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करती हैं जो क्लस्टरिंग के लिए उपयुक्त हैं। फिर हम ईवेंट कोरेफेरेंस चेन बनाने के लिए इन एम्बेडिंग पर agglomerative clustering का उपयोग करते हैं। ECB + कॉर्पस पर भीतर और क्रॉस-दस्तावेज़ दोनों के लिए, हमारा मॉडल उन मॉडलों की तुलना में बेहतर परिणाम प्राप्त करता है जिन्हें काफी अधिक पूर्व-एनोटेट जानकारी की आवश्यकता होती है। यह काम प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के साथ सह-सम्मेलन और क्लस्टरिंग समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए एक नए सामान्य दृष्टिकोण के लिए अंतर्दृष्टि और प्रेरक परिणाम प्रदान करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем подход к разрешению ядра события путем разработки общей структуры для кластеризации, которая использует контролируемое обучение представлению. Предложена архитектура нейронной сети с новыми терминами кластеризации-ориентированной регуляризации (CORE) в целевой функции. Эти термины поощряют модель к созданию вложений упоминаний событий, которые поддаются кластеризации. Затем мы используем агломеративную кластеризацию на этих вложениях для построения цепочек ядра событий. Как для внутренней, так и для кросс-документарной ориентации на корпусе ECB+, наша модель получает лучшие результаты, чем модели, которые требуют значительно больше предварительно аннотированной информации. Эта работа обеспечивает понимание и мотивирующие результаты для нового общего подхода к решению основных и кластеризации проблем с обучением представлению.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid cur chuige i láthair maidir le réiteach croíchomhdhála imeachtaí trí chreat ginearálta a fhorbairt le haghaidh cnuasaithe a úsáideann foghlaim ionadaíochta maoirsithe. Molaimid ailtireacht líonra néaraigh le téarmaí núíosacha um Rialáil atá Dírithe ar Chnuasú (CORE) san fheidhm oibiachtúil. Spreagann na téarmaí seo an tsamhail chun leabú a chruthú de lua imeachtaí atá inchúisithe le cnuasaigh. Bainimid úsáid ansin as braisliú ceirtleánaithe ar na leabaithe seo chun slabhraí croíchomhdhála imeachtaí a thógáil. I gcás croíchomhdhála laistigh agus trasdoiciméid ar chorpas an BCE+, faightear torthaí níos fearr dár samhail ná samhlacha a éilíonn faisnéis i bhfad níos réamh-anótáilte. Soláthraíonn an obair seo léargas agus torthaí inspreagtha do chur chuige ginearálta nua chun croí-chomhdhálacha agus fadhbanna cnuasaithe a réiteach le foghlaim ionadaíochta.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για την επίλυση της συγχορήγησης γεγονότων αναπτύσσοντας ένα γενικό πλαίσιο για τη συγκρότηση ομαδοποιήσεων που χρησιμοποιεί εποπτευμένη μάθηση αναπαράστασης. Προτείνουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικών δικτύων με νέους όρους Συγκεντρωτικής Ρυθμοποίησης (CORE) στην αντικειμενική λειτουργία. Αυτοί οι όροι ενθαρρύνουν το μοντέλο να δημιουργήσει ενσωματώσεις αναφορών γεγονότων που είναι διαθέσιμες σε ομαδοποίηση. Στη συνέχεια, χρησιμοποιούμε συσσωματωτική ομαδοποίηση σε αυτές τις ενσωματώσεις για να χτίσουμε αλυσίδες συγχορήγησης γεγονότων. Τόσο για τη συνάφεια εντός όσο και μεταξύ εγγράφων στο σώμα της ΕΚΤ+, το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει καλύτερα αποτελέσματα από τα μοντέλα που απαιτούν σημαντικά περισσότερες προ-σχολιασμένες πληροφορίες. Η εργασία αυτή παρέχει διορατικότητα και κίνητρα για μια νέα γενική προσέγγιση για την επίλυση προβλημάτων συνεργασίας και ομαδοποίησης με τη μάθηση αναπαράστασης.', 'hu': 'Az eseménycoreferencia megoldásának megközelítését bemutatjuk egy olyan általános klaszterezési keret kidolgozásával, amely felügyelt reprezentációs tanulást használ. Az objektív funkcióban új klasztereorientált regularizációs (CORE) kifejezésekkel rendelkező neurális hálózati architektúrát javasolunk. Ezek a kifejezések arra ösztönzik a modellt, hogy olyan eseményemlítéseket hozzon létre, amelyek fürtözésre alkalmasak. Ezután agglomerációs klaszterezést használunk ezekre a beágyazásokra, hogy eseménycoreferencia láncokat építsünk. Az EKB+ korpuszon belüli és keresztdokumentumokon belüli korreferencia tekintetében modellünk jobb eredményeket ér el, mint azok a modellek, amelyek jelentősen több előjegyzett információt igényelnek. Ez a munka betekintést és motiváló eredményeket nyújt egy új általános megközelítéshez a coreferencia és a klaszterezés problémáinak megoldására a reprezentációs tanulással.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ მოვლენების შესაძლებლობისთვის წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენისთვის, რომელიც კლასტერისთვის საერთო ფრამეტრის განვითარება, რომელიც გამოყენებ ჩვენ მინდა ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტურაციას, რომელიც ახალი კლასტერინგურაცია-ორიენტირებული რეგილარიზაცია (CORE) განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციაში. ეს სიტყვები მოძრაობს მოდელის შექმნა მოვლენების შექმნა, რომლებიც კლასტერისთვის შესაძლებელია. შემდეგ ჩვენ აგლომერატიური კლასტერების გამოყენება ამ კლასტერებზე, რომ მოვლენების წერტილების შექმნა. ECB+ კოპპუსსის შესაძლებლობად ჩვენი მოდელი უკეთესი შედეგი ვიდრე მოდელები, რომლებიც მნიშვნელოვანია უფრო მეტი მონიტურებული ინფორმაცია. ეს სამუშაო დაახლოების შესახებ და მოტივალური შედეგების შესახებ ახალი საერთო პროგრამის განსახლოებისთვის და კოსტერური პრობლემების გასწავლების შესახებ', 'it': "Presentiamo un approccio alla risoluzione della coreferenza degli eventi sviluppando un framework generale per il clustering che utilizza l'apprendimento supervisionato della rappresentazione. Proponiamo un'architettura di rete neurale con nuovi termini Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) nella funzione oggettiva. Questi termini incoraggiano il modello a creare incorporazioni di menzioni di eventi suscettibili al clustering. Usiamo quindi il clustering agglomerativo su questi embedding per costruire catene di coreferenza di eventi. Per la coreferenza sia all'interno che all'interno dei documenti incrociati sul corpus BCE+, il nostro modello ottiene risultati migliori rispetto ai modelli che richiedono un numero significativamente maggiore di informazioni pre-annotate. Questo lavoro fornisce approfondimenti e risultati motivanti per un nuovo approccio generale per risolvere i problemi di coreferenza e clustering con l'apprendimento della rappresentazione.", 'kk': 'Біз оқиғалардың сәйкестігін айырмашылығына әбден бақылау бағдарламасын қолданатын кластерлердің жалпы бағдарламасын жасап береміз. Біз невралдық желі архитектурасын жаңа Clustering- Oriented Regularization (CORE) шарттары мақсатты функциясында ұсынамыз. Бұл шарттар оқиғалардың ендіру үшін үлгісін құруға мүмкіндік береді. Содан кейін бұл ендіру үшін агломерациялық кластерлерді қолдану үшін оқиғалардың мақсаттық тізбегін құру үшін қолданамыз. ECB+ корпус ішінде және бірнеше құжаттардың қасиеттері үшін, біздің үлгіміз үлгілерінен артық мәліметті алдында талап ететін үлгілерден артық нәтижелерді алады. Бұл жұмыс жаңа жалпы қасиеттерді шешу және қасиеттерді оқыту үшін мәселелерді таңдау және қасиеттерді шешу үшін түсінікті және мотивациялау нәтижелерін', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan kepada resolusi persamaan peristiwa dengan mengembangkan kerangka umum untuk berkumpul yang menggunakan pembelajaran perwakilan yang diawasi. Kami cadangkan arkitektur rangkaian saraf dengan terma Pengaturan Orientasi-Clustering (CORE) yang baru dalam fungsi objektif. Terma ini mendorong model untuk mencipta penyelesaian peristiwa yang boleh diselesaikan. We then use agglomerative clustering on these embeddings to build event coreference chains.  Untuk kedua-dua persamaan dalam dan saling dokumen pada ECB+ corpus, model kami mendapatkan keputusan yang lebih baik daripada model yang memerlukan maklumat yang lebih lanjut. Kerja ini menyediakan pandangan dan kepentingan untuk pendekatan umum baru untuk memecahkan persamaan dan mengumpulkan masalah dengan pembelajaran perwakilan.', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ പഠനം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പൊതുവായ ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനായ നോവല്\u200d ക്ലൌസ്ട്രിങ്ങി-ഓറിയനേറ്റ് നിയമങ്ങളുടെ (CORE) വാക്കുകളുമായി നമ്മള്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200d സ് ഈ വാക്കുകള്\u200d മോഡലിനെ ആശ്വാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത സംഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ അകത്തേക്കുള്ള ആഗ്ലോമെരേറ്റിവേറ്റിയിരിക്കുന്നതിനെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഈ സംഭവത് ECB+ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലും ക്രിസ്റ്റ് രേഖകളുടെ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിനും ഉള്ളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടി വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള മോഡലു പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ പഠനത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കാനും പുതിയ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്താനുമായ ഒരു പുതിയ സാധാരണ നടപടികള്\u200dക്', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ għar-riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza tal-avvenimenti billi niżviluppaw qafas ġenerali għall-raggruppament li juża tagħlim ta’ rappreżentanza sorveljata. Aħna nipproponu arkitettura tan-netwerk newrali b’termini ġodda ta’ Regolamentazzjoni orjentata lejn ir-Raggruppament (CORE) fil-funzjoni oġġettiva. Dawn it-termini jinkoraġġixxu l-mudell biex jinħolqu inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ sejħiet ta’ avvenimenti li jistgħu jiġu raggruppati. Imbagħad nużaw raggruppament agglomerattiv fuq dawn l-inkorporazzjonijiet biex nibnu ktajjen ta’ korreferenza ta’ avvenimenti. Għall-koreferenza kemm ġewwa kif ukoll bejn id-dokumenti dwar il-BĊE+ corpus, il-mudell tagħna jikseb riżultati aħjar minn mudelli li jeħtieġu informazzjoni sostanzjalment aktar annotata minn qabel. Dan ix-xogħol jipprovdi għarfien u riżultati motivanti għal approċċ ġenerali ġdid biex jiġu solvuti l-problemi ta’ koerenza u raggruppament mat-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein tilnærming til oppløysinga for hendingar ved å utvikla eit generell rammeverk for å gruppere som brukar oversikte representasjonslæring. Vi foreslår eit neuralnettverk- arkitektur med novel Clustering-Oriented Regularizasjon (CORE) i målfunksjonen. Desse vilkåra oppfordrer modellen for å laga innbyggingar av hendingar som er mogleg til å klostera. Vi bruker så agglomerativ klassering på desse innbyggingane for å bygge hendingskkjeder. For både innenfor- og kryssdokumentkoreferanse på ECB+ korpusen, vår modell får bedre resultat enn modeller som krev mykje meir føremerkte informasjon. Dette arbeidet gjev innsikt og motivering av resultat for ein ny generell tilnærming til å løysa koreferanse og klassering av problemar med å læra representasjonar.', 'mk': 'Презентираме пристап кон резолуцијата на соодветните настани со развој на генерална рамка за групирање која користи научување на надгледувана претставница. Ние предложуваме нервна мрежа архитектура со нови термини на регуларизација ориентирана на групирање (CORE) во објективната функција. Овие термини го охрабруваат моделот да создаде вложувања на спомени на настани кои се способни за групирање. We then use agglomerative clustering on these embeddings to build event coreference chains.  За кореференцијата на ЕЦБ+ во рамките и на крстодокументите, нашиот модел добива подобри резултати од моделите кои бараат значително повеќе преанотирани информации. Оваа работа обезбедува сфаќање и мотивирање на резултатите за нов генерален пристап до решавање на соодветноста и групирање проблеми со учењето на претставништвото.', 'lt': 'We present an approach to event coreference resolution by developing a general framework for clustering that uses supervised representation learning.  Siūlome sukurti nervų tinklo architektūrą su naujomis į klasifikavimą orientuotomis reguliavimo (CORE) sąlygomis objektyvioje funkcijoje. Šie terminai skatina model į kurti renginių, kurie galėtų būti klasifikuojami, įtraukimus. Tuomet naudojame aglomeracinę grupuotę ant šių įdėjimų, kad statytume įvykių koreferencijos grandines. Kad būtų galima susipažinti su ECB+ korpusu ir su kitais dokumentais, mūsų modelis gauna geresnių rezultatų nei modeliai, kuriems reikia gerokai daugiau iš anksto užrašytos informacijos. Šis darbas suteikia supratimą ir motyvuojančius rezultatus naujam bendram požiūriui į koreferencijos sprendimą ir atstovavimo mokymosi problemų grupavimą.', 'mn': 'Бид үйл явдлын зөвхөн зөвшөөрөл шийдвэрлэлийн арга барилгыг дамжуулан харуулах сургалтыг хэрэглэдэг бүлэгтэй ерөнхий хэлбэрийг бүтээж байна. Бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурыг зорилготой функц дээр шинэ Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) томъёог санал болгож байна. Эдгээр хэлбэрүүд нь загварыг бүтээж чадах үйл явдлын нэгдэл бий болгох боломжтой. Дараа нь бид эдгээр холбоонууд дээр агломератив хэлбэрийг ашиглаж үйл явдлын зөвхөн зөвхөн зохион байгуулахын тулд хэрэглэдэг. ECB+ корпус-ын дотор болон олон баримтын дотор зөвшөөрөл байдлын тулд бидний загвар нь илүү анзаарсан мэдээлэл хэрэгтэй загвараас илүү сайн үр дүнг авдаг. Энэ ажлын үр дүнг илэрхийлэл суралцах асуудлыг шинэ ерөнхий арга замыг шийдэхэд ойлголт, урам зориг өгдөг.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy podejście do rozwiązywania współdziałań zdarzeń poprzez opracowanie ogólnych ram klastrowania, które wykorzystują uczenie się nadzorowanej reprezentacji. Proponujemy architekturę sieci neuronowej z nowymi terminami klastrowanej regularyzacji (CORE) w funkcji obiektywnej. Terminy te zachęcają model do tworzenia osadzeń wzmianek o zdarzeniach, które podlegają klastrowaniu. Następnie używamy grupowania aglomeracyjnego na tych osadzeniach, aby zbudować łańcuchy współpracy zdarzeń. Zarówno w przypadku współreferencji wewnątrz- jak i między dokumentami w korpusie EBC+, nasz model uzyskuje lepsze wyniki niż modele, które wymagają znacznie więcej wstępnie adnotacji informacji. Praca ta zapewnia wgląd i motywujące wyniki dla nowego ogólnego podejścia do rozwiązywania problemów współdziałania i klastrowania z uczeniem się reprezentacji.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o abordare a rezolvării corefenței evenimentelor prin dezvoltarea unui cadru general pentru clustering care utilizează învățarea reprezentării supravegheate. Propunem o arhitectură de rețea neurală cu termeni noi de regularizare orientată spre clustering (CORE) în funcția obiectivă. Acești termeni încurajează modelul să creeze încorporări de mențiuni de evenimente care pot fi grupate. Apoi folosim clustering aglomerativ pe aceste încorporări pentru a construi lanțuri de coreferență de evenimente. Atât pentru corefența în cadrul documentelor, cât și în cadrul corpului BCE+, modelul nostru obține rezultate mai bune decât modelele care necesită mai multe informații pre-adnotate. Această lucrare oferă perspective și rezultate motivante pentru o nouă abordare generală pentru rezolvarea corefenței și clusterizarea problemelor cu învățarea reprezentării.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo pristup rezoluciji pristojnosti događaja razvojom općeg okvira za skupljanje koji koristi nadzorno učenje predstavljanja. Predlažemo neuralnu mrežu arhitekturu sa novim uvjetima regularizacije (CORE) u objektivnoj funkciji. Ovi uslovi ohrabruju model da stvori integracije događaja spominje koje su prilagodljive za skupljanje. Onda koristimo agglomerativne skupljanje na ovim ugrađenjima kako bi izgradili lance korisnosti događaja. Za oboje u unutrašnjost i prekršenog dokumenta na ECB+ korpusu, naš model dobija bolji rezultat od modela koji zahtevaju značajno više pre-annotiranih informacija. Ovaj rad pruža uvid i motivacije rezultata za novi opći pristup rješavanju pristojnosti i skupljanju problema sa učenjem predstavljanja.', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ku saabsan heshiiska qaybta dhacda, si a an u horumarinno qalabka caadiga ah, kaas oo isticmaalaya barashada wakiilka la ilaaliyo. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa dhismaha shabakadda neurada ee la leeyahay novel Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) oo ku qoran waxyaabaha la jeedo. Sharcigaasi waxay ku dhiirrigeliyaan tusaale ahaan in ay sameyn karto xujooyin dhacdooyinka oo u habboon dhaqdhaqaaqa. Dabadeedna waxaynu isticmaalaynaa kooxo ka mid ah kuwa soo saara, si aan u dhisno silsiladaha dhacdooyinka. Tusaale’yadeenu wuxuu heli karaa mid ka wanaagsan tusaale ahaan u baahan yihiin macluumaad ka sii daran warqad horay loo baahan yahay. Shaqadaasu waxey ka heleysaa waxyaabo iyo waxqabad la siiyo sabab cusub oo ay u xalliyaan dhibaatooyin ku saabsan waxbarashada wakiilka.', 'si': 'අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරධානයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරධානයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. අපි න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා අදාර්ථ වැඩක් වලින් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. මේ වර්තනය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා මොඩේල් එක සිද්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් සිද්ධ වෙන්න. ඊට පස්සේ අපි මේ ඇන්බින්ඩින්ග් එක්ක සිද්ධියක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා සිද්ධියක් කෝරෙෆරෙන්ස් සිද් ECB+ කෝර්පුස් වලින් සහ විශාල විදියට, අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප මේ වැඩේ අලුත් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett tillvägagångssätt för händelsecoreference lösning genom att utveckla en allmän ram för klustring som använder övervakad representation lärande. Vi föreslår en neural nätverksarkitektur med nya Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) termer i den objektiva funktionen. Dessa termer uppmuntrar modellen att skapa inbäddningar av händelseomnämnanden som kan grupperas. Vi använder sedan agglomerativ klustring på dessa inbäddningar för att bygga händelsecoreferencekedjor. För både intern- och tvärdokumentkorrefens på ECB+-korpusen ger vår modell bättre resultat än modeller som kräver betydligt mer förhandskommenterad information. Detta arbete ger insikt och motiverande resultat för en ny allmän strategi för att lösa coreference och klustringsproblem med representationslärande.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ کلسٹر کے لئے ایک عمومی فرم پیدا کرنے کے ذریعہ ایک طریقہ پیش کریں جو نظارت کی تعلیم کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے. ہم نے ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک معماری پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو نئی کلسٹرینگ-Oriented Regularization (CORE) شرایط کے ساتھ مقرر کردے ہیں۔ یہ شرمگاہوں نے موڈل کو مشغول بنانے کے لئے مہربانی کرتا ہے جو کلسٹرینگ کے لئے قابل ہے۔ اس کے بعد ہم ان گھوٹوں پر گروہ گرا کر رہے ہیں کہ ان کے ذریعے مضبوط زنجیروں کو بنائیں ECB+ کورپوس کے درمیان اور کروس ڈکومکسٹ کے لئے ہماری مدل سے بہتر نتائج حاصل کرتا ہے جو مدل سے زیادہ اچھی مطلب کی ضرورت رکھتی ہے۔ یہ کام ایک نئی عمومی طریقہ کے لئے بصیرت اور تحقیق کا نتیجہ دیتا ہے کہ مہربانی کا حل کرنا اور نمایش کی تعلیم کے ساتھ مشکلات کا کلسٹر کرنا۔', 'ta': 'நாம் நிகழ்வு குறிப்பு தீர்வு தெளிவுத்திறனை உருவாக்க ஒரு பொது சட்டத்தை முன்னேற்றுகிறோம். அது பாதுகாப்பாக நாம் புதிய க்ளூஸ்டிரிங்- தூர்ந்து வழக்கம் (CORE) விதிகளுடன் ஒரு புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கியத்தை நிர்ணயிக் இந்த வார்த்தைகள் மாதிரியை ஆர்வம் செய்ய முடியும் நிகழ்வு குறிப்புகளின் உள்ளடக்கங்களை உருவாக்கும் பொரு We then use agglomerative clustering on these embeddings to build event coreference chains.  ECB+ கார்ப்ஸ் மீதும் உள்ள- மற்றும் cross-ஆவண குறிப்பு மூலம் இருவருக்கும், எங்கள் மாதிரியில் முன்னால் குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் தேவைப்படும் மா இந்த வேலை புதிய பொதுவான முறையை தீர்க்கும் மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட படிப்பில் பிரச்சனைகளை தீர்வு செய்யும் பொத', 'uz': "Biz tashqari murojaat qilishni hozir qilamiz, tashkilotni taʼminlovchi tashkilotni o'rganish uchun umumiy freymni yaratish mumkin. Biz objektiv funksiyatidagi novel Clustering-Orientation Regulatsiya (CORE) axbori bilan neyrol tarmoqni tahrirlash talab qilamiz. Bu so'zlar modelni ishlab chiqaradi, hodisa ishlab chiqarish mumkin. Keyin biz bu hodisa boshqa shaxsiy mushkalarni ishlatamiz. ECB+ corpusning ichida koʻp hujjatning qismlari uchun modelmiz juda qisqa natijalarini olib tashlaydi. Bu ishni taqdimot o'rganish uchun yangi umumiy usulni ishlab chiqarish va taqdimlik o'rganish muammolarini o'zgartirish uchun ishlash natijalariga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp giải quyết khả năng của các sự kiện bằng cách phát triển một quy định chung về cụm liệu sử dụng học đại diện giám sát. Chúng tôi đề xuất một kiến trúc mạng thần kinh với các thuật ngữ Liên hợp-về phương thức mới trong hàm mục tiêu. Những chữ này thúc đẩy mô hình để tạo sự nhúng chàm đề cập đến những nơi có thể tụ tập. Chúng ta sử dụng tụ tập xung quanh những sự tác thành này để xây dựng dây cưa phá sự kiện. Đối với khả năng hạn chế cả trong nội dung và chéo tài liệu trên tập đoàn của ta, mô hình của ta đạt kết quả tốt hơn những mẫu yêu cầu thông tin trước ghi chú. Công trình này cung cấp kết quả sáng suốt và động lực cho một phương pháp mới để giải quyết khả năng cao và rắc rối khi học đại diện.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en tilgang til event coreference løsning ved at udvikle en generel ramme for clustering, der bruger supervised repræsentation learning. Vi foreslår en neural netværksarkitektur med nye Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) termer i den objektive funktion. Disse udtryk opfordrer modellen til at oprette integreringer af begivenhedsnævnelser, der kan klynges. Vi bruger derefter agglomerativ klyngning på disse indlejringer til at bygge begivenhedskoreference kæder. Vores model opnår bedre resultater end modeller, der kræver betydeligt flere præannotaterede oplysninger. Dette arbejde giver indsigt og motiverende resultater til en ny generel tilgang til løsning af coreference- og klyngeproblemer med repræsentationslæring.', 'bg': 'Представяме подход към решаването на съпровождане на събития чрез разработване на обща рамка за клъстериране, която използва контролирано обучение за представяне. Предлагаме архитектура на невронната мрежа с нови термини за клъстерно-ориентирана регуляризация (КОРЕ) в обективната функция. Тези термини насърчават модела да създава вграждания на споменавания на събития, които могат да бъдат групирани. След това използваме агломеративно клъстериране върху тези вграждания, за да изградим вериги за кореференция на събития. Както за вътрешно- така и междудокументната кореференция на корпуса ЕЦБ+, нашият модел постига по-добри резултати от моделите, които изискват значително повече предварително анотирана информация. Тази работа предоставя прозрение и мотивиращи резултати за нов общ подход за решаване на проблеми с кореференцията и клъстерирането с обучението за представителство.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een aanpak van event coreference resolutie door een algemeen raamwerk voor clustering te ontwikkelen dat gebruik maakt van supervised representation learning. We stellen een neurale netwerkarchitectuur voor met nieuwe Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) termen in de objectieve functie. Deze termen moedigen het model aan om insluitingen te maken van gebeurtenisvermeldingen die geschikt zijn voor clustering. Vervolgens gebruiken we agglomeratieve clustering op deze embeddings om event coreference ketens te bouwen. Voor zowel binnen- als cross-document coreferentie op het ECB+-corpus levert ons model betere resultaten op dan modellen die aanzienlijk meer vooraf geannoteerde informatie vereisen. Dit werk geeft inzicht en motiverende resultaten voor een nieuwe algemene aanpak van het oplossen van coreferenz- en clusteringsproblemen met representatielernen.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo pristup rješavanju pristojnosti događaja razvijanjem općeg okvira za skupljanje koji koristi nadzorno učenje predstavljanja. Predlažemo arhitekturu neuralne mreže s novim uvjetima regularizacije (CORE) iz objektivne funkcije. Ovi uvjeti poticavaju model da stvori integracije događaja spominju se koje su prilagođene skupljanju. Onda koristimo agglomerativne skupljanje na ovim ugrađenjima kako bi izgradili lance korisnosti događaja. Za primjenu unutar i prekršenog dokumenta na ECB+ korpusu, naš model dobija bolji rezultat od modela koji zahtijevaju značajno veće predanotirane informacije. Ovaj rad pruža uvid i motivacije rezultata za novi opći pristup rješavanju pristojnosti i skupljanju problema sa učenjem predstavljanja.', 'id': 'We present an approach to event coreference resolution by developing a general framework for clustering that uses supervised representation learning.  Kami mengusulkan arsitektur jaringan saraf dengan istilah Regularisasi Orientasi-Clustering (CORE) yang baru dalam fungsi objektif. Terma-terma ini mendorong model untuk menciptakan embedding peristiwa menyebutkan yang mudah untuk berkumpul. Kemudian kita menggunakan agglomerative clustering pada embedding ini untuk membangun rantai koreferensi peristiwa. Untuk persamaan dalam dan saling dokumen pada ECB+ corpus, model kami mendapatkan hasil yang lebih baik dari model yang membutuhkan informasi yang jauh lebih preanotasi. Pekerjaan ini menyediakan penglihatan dan hasil yang mendorong untuk pendekatan umum baru untuk memecahkan persamaan dan mengumpulkan masalah dengan pelajaran representation.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen Ansatz zur Lösung von Ereigniskoreferenz durch die Entwicklung eines allgemeinen Rahmens für Clustering, das betreutes Repräsentationslernen nutzt. Wir schlagen eine neuronale Netzwerkarchitektur mit neuartigen Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) Begriffen in der objektiven Funktion vor. Diese Begriffe ermutigen das Modell, Einbettungen von Ereigniserwähnungen zu erstellen, die für Clustering geeignet sind. Wir verwenden dann agglomeratives Clustering auf diesen Einbettungen, um Event-Coreferenzketten aufzubauen. Sowohl für die innerhalb- als auch dokumentübergreifende Koreferenz auf dem ECB+-Korpus erzielt unser Modell bessere Ergebnisse als Modelle, die deutlich mehr vorannotierte Informationen benötigen. Diese Arbeit liefert Einblicke und motivierende Ergebnisse für einen neuen allgemeinen Ansatz zur Lösung von Coreferenz- und Clusterproblemen mit Repräsentationslernen.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش به راه حل رضایت رضایت رویداد را با توسعه یک چهارچوب عمومی برای گروهی که از یادگیری رضایت کنترل استفاده می\u200cکند، نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما یک معماری شبکه عصبی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم با شرایط نویسی کلاسترینگ-Oriented Regularization (CORE) در عملکرد هدف. این شرایط ها مدل را تشویق می کنند تا ابتدایی از حادثه\u200cها را تولید کند که قابل تغییر جمع شدن هستند. سپس از گروه\u200cهای گروهی روی این گروهی استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا زنجیرهای مربوط به اتفاق بسازیم. برای همچنین درون و متوسط سند در مورد شرکت ECB+، مدل ما نتایج بهتر از مدل\u200cها را می\u200cگیرد که نیاز به اطلاعات پیش\u200cنویسی بیشتری دارند. این کار نتیجه\u200cهای مشاهده و انگیزه برای یک روش عمومی جدید برای حل رضایت و مشکلات با یادگیری نمایش\u200cدهندگان را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunatoa mbinu ya kutatua suluhisho la tukio kwa kutengeneza mfumo wa jumla kwa ajili ya kuunganisha utaratibu unaotumia elimu ya uwakilishi. Tunazipendekeza ujenzi wa mtandao wa kisasa wenye mihula ya utaratibu wa Clusting-oriented Clusting (CORE) katika kazi ya malengo. Maneno haya yanahamasisha muundo wa kutengeneza maeneo ya matukio yanayohusiana na kuingiza. Kisha tunatumia viungo vinavyohusiana na viungo hivyo kwa ajili ya kutengeneza viungo vikuu vya tukio. Kwa viwili vyote vinavyotokana na makala yanayovuka kwenye makampuni ya ECB+ yanaweza kupata matokeo bora kuliko mifano yanayohitaji taarifa za kabla. Kazi hii inatoa matokeo yenye ufahamu na yenye hamasa kwa njia mpya ya kutatua matatizo yanayohusu elimu ya uwakilishi.', 'ko': '우리는 사용 감독이 학습을 표시하는 분류 통용 프레임워크를 개발함으로써 사건 공지 해소 방법을 제시했다.우리는 목표 함수에 새로운 분류를 위한 정규화(핵심)항을 도입한 신경 네트워크 구조를 제시했다.이 용어들은 모형이 집단에 맞는 이벤트 언급 삽입을 만드는 것을 장려한다.그리고 우리는 이 삽입에 응집 집합을 사용하여 사건 공지사슬을 구축한다.ECB+ 자료 라이브러리의 문서 내와 크로스 문서가 모두 가리키는 경우, 우리의 모델은 더 많은 주석 정보를 필요로 하는 모델보다 더 좋은 결과를 얻었다.이 작업은 표징 학습 중의 공지와 분류 문제를 해결하기 위해 새로운 통용적인 방법을 제공하였다.', 'tr': 'Gözlemli temsil öwrenmesini ulanan klusterlemek üçin umumy çerçewçilikden çözümlenmek üçin bir nusga çözümlenmäge meýilleşdirýäris. Biz Nural a ýry arhitekturlygy (CORE) şu maksadyň şeklinde roman Clustering-Oriental Regularizasy (CORE) şeklinde tassyklandyrýarys. Bu terjimeler bolup clusterlemek üçin örän nusgasyny çykarmak üçin nusgasyny çaşyrýarlar. Soňra bu integralarda aglomerativ clustering ulanýarys. Event coreferens zincirlerini inşa etmek üçin. ECB+ köpüsünde hem içinde hem-de geçiş senediň çekişigi üçin modellerimiz has öňünden täsirli maglumaty gereken modellerden gowy netijede bolar. Bu işe nähili ýüregi çözmeli we öngörüm öwrenmesi bilen täze umumy golam üçin pikir we nähili näsaz getirilýär.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n toegang tot gebeurtenis koreferensie oplossing deur 'n algemene raamwerk te ontwikkel vir clustering wat gebruik ondersoekte voorlegging leer. Ons voorstel 'n neurale netwerk arkitektuur met roman Clustering-Orienteerde Regulisering (CORE) terme in die objektief funksie. Hierdie terme moet die model aanbevestig om inbettings van gebeurtenis te skep wat kan aanwend word na clustering. Ons gebruik dan aglomeratiewe clustering op hierdie inbêding om gebeurtenis koreferensiekettings te bou. Vir beide binne- en kruisdokument-koreferensie op die ECB+ korpus, ons model kry beter resultate as modele wat betekeurig meer pre- annotated inligting nodig. Hierdie werk verskaf insig en motiveer resultate vir 'n nuwe algemene toegang tot die oplossing van koreferensie en klastering van probleme met voorstelling leer.", 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք իրադարձությունների համեմատական լուծումների մոտեցում' զարգացնելով ընդհանուր շրջանակներ խմբավորումների համար, որոնք օգտագործում են վերահսկված ներկայացուցիչ ուսումնասիրություն: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություն, որն ունի նոր խմբագրման-ուղղությամբ ռեգուլարիզացիայի (COre) տերմիններ օբյեկտիվ ֆունկցիայի մեջ: Այս տերմինները խրախուսում են մոդելը ստեղծելու միջոցառումների ներառումներ, որոնք կարելի է խմբավորել: Այնուհետև մենք օգտագործում ենք ագլոմերատիվ խմբագրություն այս ներդրումների վրա, որպեսզի կառուցենք իրադարձությունների կորեֆերանսի շղթաներ: ԵՎ+ կորպոսի վրա մեր մոդելը ավելի լավ արդյունք է ստանում, քան մոդելները, որոնք կարիք ունեն ավելի շատ նախագրված տեղեկատվություն: Այս աշխատանքը պարունակում է ընկալումներ և դրդապատճառող արդյունքներ նոր ընդհանուր մոտեցումների համար հարաբերությունների լուծման և ընդհանուր խնդիրների խմբավորումների համար ընկալումների ուսումնասիրության հետ:", 'am': 'We present an approach to event coreference resolution by developing a general framework for clustering that uses supervised representation learning.  አካባቢው ስርዓት ውስጥ በኖሮው Clustering-Orientated Regularization (CORE) የተባለው የኔትራዊ መረብ መሠረት መክፈቻን እናሳስባለን፡፡ እነዚህም ጽሑፎች ምሳሌን ለመፍጠር የሚችሉትን የኢንተርኔት ማስታወቂያውን ለመፍጠር ያሞክራሉ፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም የግንኙነቱን ሰንሰለቶች ለመሥራት ግንኙነትን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በECB+ ኮርፓስ ላይ የሥልጣን ሰነድ ግንኙነት ለሁለቱም፣ ሞዴላያችን አስቀድሞ በተለየ መረጃ ከሚያስፈልጋቸው ምርጥ ፍሬዎችን ያገኛል፡፡ ይሄ ሥራ አዲስ የውይይት እና ማስታወቂያውን ለመፍታት አዲስ የጠቅላላ ጉዳይ እና የመፍጠርን ጉዳይ ለመፍታት ያሳስፋል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz vəziyyətlərin mərhəmətli çəkişməsinə yaxınlıq göstəririk, nəzarət edilmiş göstəricisi öyrənməsini istifadə edən qonaqlıq üçün genel bir qurqumu təhsil edərək. Biz yeni Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) şartları ilə nöral a ğ arhitektarını məqsədilə təklif edirik. Bu şartlar modelini clusterinə müvəffəq edə biləcək olaraq istifadə etmək üçün təşkil edir. Sonra bu inşalların üstündə agglomerativ clustering istifadə edirik ki, olaraq mərhəmət zəncirlərini inşa etmək üçün. ECB+ korpusu barəsindəki hər ikisi və çoxlu dökümət müqabiliyyəti üçün modelimiz daha çox əvvəlcə bildirilmiş məlumatlardan daha yaxşı sonuçlar alır. Bu işin yeni genel tərzim çəkməsi və tərzim öyrənməsi ilə problemləri çəkməsi üçün nəticə və motivasiya nəticələri təmin edir.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një qasje për zgjidhjen e bashkëkonferencës së ngjarjeve duke zhvilluar një kuadër të përgjithshëm për grupimin që përdor mësimin e përfaqësimit të mbikqyrur. Ne propozojmë një arkitekturë rrjeti nervor me terma të reja të Regulimit të Orientuar në Grupim (CORE) në funksionin objektiv. Këto terma inkurajojnë modelin për të krijuar përfshirje të ngjarjeve përmend që janë të përshtatshme për grupimin. Pastaj përdorim grupe aglomerative në këto përfshirje për të ndërtuar zinxhirë koreference ngjarjesh. Për korreferencën brenda dhe ndër-dokumente mbi ECB+ corpus, modeli ynë merr rezultate më të mira se modelet që kërkojnë informacion më të parashënuar. Ky punë ofron kuptim dhe rezultate motivuese për një qasje të re të përgjithshme për zgjidhjen e bashkëdrejtimit dhe grupimin e problemeve me mësimin e përfaqësimit.', 'bn': 'আমরা অনুষ্ঠানের কোরেফেন্স সিদ্ধান্তের কাছে একটি উপায় নিয়ে এসেছি যা প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে সাধারণ ফ্রেম উন আমরা একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর প্রস্তাব করছি যার সাথে নোভেল ক্লাস্টিং-অরিয়েন্টিং নিয়মিতকরণ (CORE) শর্তের মাধ্যমে। এই শব্দগুলো মডেলের উৎসাহ প্রদান করে যে অনুষ্ঠানের উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে তা তৈরি করার জন্য উৎসাহ প্রদান করা যায়, যা  তারপর আমরা এই প্রবেশগুলোর উপর ব্যবহার করি অনুষ্ঠানের কোরেফারেন্স শিকল তৈরি করার জন্য। ইসিবি+ কোর্পাসের ব্যাপারে ভিতরে এবং ক্রস-নথির কোরেফারেন্সের জন্য, আমাদের মডেলের চেয়ে ভাল ফলাফল পেয়ে যায়, যা পূর্বে বিরক্তিকর তথ্য এই কাজে প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষার সাথে প্রতিনিধিত্বের সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য নতুন সাধারণ উপায়ের জন্য দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং উদ্দে', 'cs': 'Představujeme přístup k řešení koreferencí událostí vytvořením obecného rámce pro clustering, který využívá učení supervizorované reprezentace. Navrhujeme architekturu neuronové sítě s novými pojmy Clustering-Oriented Regularizace (CORE) v objektivní funkci. Tyto termíny povzbuzují model k vytváření vložení zmínek událostí, které jsou přístupné pro shlukování. Na těchto vloženích pak používáme aglomerační shlukování k vytvoření řetězců společnosti událostí. Pro koreferenci v korpusu ECB+ v rámci dokumentů i mezi nimi dosahuje náš model lepších výsledků než modely, které vyžadují výrazně více předem anotovaných informací. Tato práce poskytuje pohled a motivující výsledky pro nový obecný přístup k řešení problémů koreference a clusterování s učením reprezentace.', 'et': 'Tutvustame lähenemisviisi sündmuste kortereferentsi lahendamisele, töötades välja klastrite üldise raamistiku, mis kasutab järelevalveõpet. Pakume välja närvivõrgu arhitektuuri, millel on objektiivses funktsioonis uudsed klastritele orienteeritud regulariseerimise terminid (CORE). Need terminid julgustavad mudelit luua sündmuste märgistuste manustamist, mis on klastrite jaoks võimalikud. Seejärel kasutame nendel manustamistel aglomeratiivset klastrit, et ehitada sündmuste kortereferentsiahelaid. Nii EKP+ korpuse sisese kui ka dokumentidevahelise kaasviite puhul on meie mudel parem kui mudelid, mis nõuavad märkimisväärselt rohkem eelnevalt märgitud teavet. See töö pakub ülevaadet ja motiveerivaid tulemusi uue üldise lähenemisviisi lahendamiseks seoses esindusõppega kaasnevate ja klastrite moodustamisega.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme toimintamallin tapahtumakoreferenssin ratkaisuun kehittämällä yleisen viitekehyksen klusteroinnille, jossa hyödynnetään valvottua representaatiooppimista. Ehdotamme neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuria, jossa on uusia Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) -termejä objektiivifunktiossa. Nämä termit kannustavat mallia luomaan klusterointiin soveltuvien tapahtumamainintojen upotuksia. Tämän jälkeen käytämme agglomeratiivista klusterointia näissä upotuksissa tapahtumakorferenssiketjujen rakentamiseen. Sekä EKP+-korpuseen että dokumenttien väliseen yhteisvertailuun mallimme tuottaa parempia tuloksia kuin mallit, jotka edellyttävät huomattavasti enemmän ennakkomerkintöjä. Tämä työ tarjoaa oivalluksia ja motivoivia tuloksia uudelle yleiselle lähestymistavalle yhteisviittaus- ja klusterointiongelmien ratkaisemiseksi edustuksen oppimisessa.', 'ca': "We present an approach to event coreference resolution by developing a general framework for clustering that uses supervised representation learning.  We propose a neural network architecture with novel Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE) terms in the objective function.  These terms encourage the model to create embeddings of event mentions that are amenable to clustering.  Després fem servir agrupaments aglomeratius en aquestes integracions per construir cadenes de coreferència d'eventos. Per a la referència interior i transversal al BCE+ corpus, el nostre model obté millors resultats que models que requereixen informació significativament més prenotada. This work provides insight and motivating results for a new general approach to solving coreference and clustering problems with representation learning.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo pristup rezoluciji pristojnosti događaja razvijanjem općeg okvira za skupljanje koji koristi nadzorno učenje predstavljanja. Predlažemo arhitekturu neuralne mreže s novom uvjetom regularizacije (CORE) u objektivnoj funkciji. Ovi uslovi ohrabruju model da stvori integracije događaja spominje koje su prilagođene skupljanju. Onda koristimo agglomerativne skupljanje na ovim ugrađenjima kako bi izgradili lance korisnosti događaja. Za primjenu unutrašnjost i prekršenog dokumenta na ECB+ korpusu, naš model dobija bolji rezultat od modela koji zahtijevaju značajno više predanotiranih informacija. Ovaj rad pruža uvid i motivacije rezultata za novi opći pristup rješavanju pristojnosti i skupljanju problema sa učenjem predstavljanja.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo nggawe gerasane nggawe gerangkat oleh operasi kanggo nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggambar aturan tapi tarjamahan. Awak dhéwé ngerti perintah pengaturan tambah jewel karo ngono kuwi basa clustering-Oriented Regulalisation (COMRED) kuwi kesempatan nggawe buktuan Awakdhéwé éntuk perbudhakan nggawe modèl kanggo nggawe akeh stiftan kanggo langgar ujarane Kernel Daerah dumadhi-dumadhi karo corefen -karo kesalakno dumadhi podho ESB+, model nampir dumadhi sing luwih dumadhi kuwi model sing bisa ditambah dumadhi, akeh nyong lanjut informasi sing wis diangatus online Wudmu iki bakal ngewehi alih lan mbelak dhéwé kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno sistem sing apik lan ijol-ijolan sing nggawe gerakan kelangan kuwi mau.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wata matsayi zuwa masu buƙata masu husũma da kwamfyuta ta samun firam mai iya ƙarfafa da za'a yi amfani da karatun karatun masu tsari. Tune goyyar da wani matsayin tarayyan na neural wanda ke da mazaɓa na Clusting-Orientated Regular (CONE) cikin aikin an objective. Wannan magana ta ƙara motel da za'a ƙiƙira cikin sunan ayuka da aka sami da su sami zuwa ƙaramawa. Sa'an nan kuma Munã yi amfani da matsayin samuraya a kan waɗannan matsayin ayuka. Ga duk takardar-guda da guda-kuma-guda-takardar-rubutu na rubutun ECB+ ƙarami yana da mafiya kyau ga fassarar misãlai da ke ƙayyade babban lãbãri mai gaba-yanzu. This work provides insight and motivating results for a new general approach to solving coreference and clustering problems with representation learning.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo pristop k reševanju koreference dogodkov z razvojem splošnega okvira za grozdje, ki uporablja nadzorovano reprezentativno učenje. V objektivni funkciji predlagamo arhitekturo nevronskega omrežja z novimi izrazi regularizacije grozdov (CORE). Ti izrazi spodbujajo model k ustvarjanju vdelav omenjenih dogodkov, ki jih je mogoče združiti v grozdih. Nato uporabljamo aglomerativno grozdje na teh vdelah za gradnjo verig dogodkov. Naš model dosega boljše rezultate tako v primerjavi z modeli, ki zahtevajo bistveno več vnaprej navedenih informacij, tako znotraj kot navzkrižno referenco o korpusu ECB+. To delo zagotavlja vpogled in motivacijske rezultate za nov splošni pristop k reševanju problemov povezovanja in grozdov s predstavniškim učenjem.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים גישה לפתרון התאמה של אירועים על ידי פיתוח סגרת כללית לקבוצת אשר משתמשת ללמוד מייצג מושלם. אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה רשת עצבית עם מונחים חדשים של רפורטיזציה ממוקדמת (CORE) בתפקיד האובייקטיבי. התנאים האלה מעודדים את המודל ליצור תוספות של זיכרונות אירועים שיכולים להתקבל. We then use agglomerative clustering on these embeddings to build event coreference chains.  עבור התאמה בתוך המסמכים וגם בין המסמכים על הקורפוס של האי.בי.איי+, המודל שלנו מקבל תוצאות טובות יותר מאשר מודלים שדורשים מידע משמעותי יותר מוזכר. העבודה הזאת מספקת תוצאות מוטיבציה ולהגישה כללית חדשה לפתור בעיות משותפות ומקבוצות עם לימוד מייצג.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གནད་གཤིས་འགྱུར་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ཤིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་Clustering-Oriented Regularization (CORE)དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ལས་ཁོངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཅིག་བསམ འདི་དག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདིས་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གསར་འཛུགས་དགོས་མེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ECB+ corpus་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་གྱིས། ང་ཚོའི་མིག་ཆས་འདིས་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྐུལ་བ་མང་ཙམ ལས་ཀ་འདིས་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་། རྒན་སྐྱེས་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གི་ཐབས་ཤེས་བྱེད་སྐབས'}
{'en': 'Learning distributed event representations with a multi-task approach', 'ar': 'تعلم تمثيلات الأحداث الموزعة باستخدام نهج متعدد المهام', 'fr': "Apprentissage de représentations d'événements distribuées avec une approche multitâche", 'es': 'Aprendizaje de representaciones de eventos distribuidos con un enfoque multitarea', 'pt': 'Aprendendo representações de eventos distribuídos com uma abordagem multitarefa', 'ja': 'マルチタスクアプローチで分散イベント表現を学習する', 'hi': 'एक बहु-कार्य दृष्टिकोण के साथ वितरित ईवेंट अभ्यावेदन सीखना', 'zh': '用多任务法学分布式事', 'ru': 'Изучение распределенных представлений событий с помощью многозадачного подхода', 'ga': 'Dáiltear an fhoghlaim ar léiriúcháin imeachtaí le cur chuige ilthasc', 'hu': 'Elosztott eseményreprezentációk tanulása többfeladatos megközelítéssel', 'ka': 'გაყოფილი მოვლენების გამოსახულების შესწავლობა, რამდენიმე მოვლენების მიზეზით', 'el': 'Μάθηση κατανεμημένων αναπαραστάσεων γεγονότων με μια προσέγγιση πολλαπλών εργασιών', 'it': 'Imparare le rappresentazioni distribuite di eventi con un approccio multi-task', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тапсырма арқылы үлестірілген оқиғаларды көрсету', 'lt': 'Išmokyti paskirstytus renginių atstovavimus taikant daugiafunkcinį metodą', 'mk': 'Learning distributed event representations with a multi-task approach', 'ms': 'Belajar mewakili peristiwa yang disebarkan dengan pendekatan berbilang-tugas', 'ml': 'Learning distributed event representations with a multi-task approach', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti tal-avvenimenti b’approċċ multikompitu', 'mn': 'Олон ажлын арга хэмжээгээр хуваарилсан үйл явдлыг сурах', 'no': 'Læring av distribuert hendingssrepresentasjonar med fleire oppgåver', 'pl': 'Uczenie się rozproszonych reprezentacji zdarzeń z podejściem wielozadaniowym', 'ro': 'Învățarea reprezentărilor de evenimente distribuite cu o abordare multi-task', 'sr': 'Naučenje raspodijeljenih predstavljanja događaja sa višestrukim pristupom', 'so': 'Barista dhacdooyinka loo qaybsaday oo ku qoran qaab badan oo shaqo', 'si': 'ගොඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'sv': 'LĂ¤r dig distribuerade hĂ¤ndelserepresentationer med en flerfunktionsmetod', 'ur': 'تقسیم کئے ہوئے حادثہ کی تعلیم کی تعلیم multi-task approach کے ساتھ', 'ta': 'பல பணி செயல் முறையுடன் பங்கிடப்பட்ட நிகழ்வு பிரதிநிதிகளை கற்றுக்கொண்டு', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Trình diễn diễn diễn diễn tập đa nhiệm vụ', 'da': 'Læring af distribuerede hændelsesrepræsentationer med en multi-task tilgang', 'bg': 'Учене на разпределени представяния на събития с многозадачен подход', 'nl': 'Het leren van gedistribueerde gebeurtenisrepresentaties met een multi-task aanpak', 'hr': 'Naučenje raspodijeljenih predstavljanja događaja s višestrukim pristupom', 'id': 'Belajar representation peristiwa yang disebarkan dengan pendekatan multi-tugas', 'ko': '다중 임무 방법으로 분포식 이벤트 표시를 학습하다', 'sw': 'Learning distributed event representations with a multi-task approach', 'de': 'Lernen verteilter Ereignisdarstellungen mit einem Multi-Task-Ansatz', 'tr': 'Birnäçe-täblisaň nusgalaryny öwrenmek üçin', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای رویداد پراکنده\u200cشده با روش چندین کار', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përfaqësimeve të shpërndara të ngjarjeve me një qasje shumëdetyrore', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Սովորեցնել տարածված իրադարձությունների ներկայացումները բազմախնդիրների մոտեցման միջոցով', 'az': 'Dağırılmış olaraq ifadələri öyrənmək çoxlu işlər tərzində', 'bn': 'বিতরণ করা অনুষ্ঠানের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিতরণের শিক্ষা অনুষ্ঠানের প্রতিনিধিত্ব', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'ca': "Aprendre representacions distribuïdes d'esdeveniments amb un enfocament multitascat", 'et': 'Jagatud sündmuste esitamise õppimine mitme ülesandega', 'bs': 'Naučenje raspodijeljenih predstavljanja događaja sa višestrukim pristupom', 'cs': 'Učení distribuovaných reprezentací událostí s víceúlohovým přístupem', 'fi': 'Hajautettujen tapahtumaesitysten oppiminen monitehtävällä lähestymistavalla', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'ללמוד מייצגי אירועים מופזרים עם גישה רבה משימות', 'sk': 'Učenje porazdeljenih predstavitev dogodkov z večopravilnim pristopom', 'ha': 'Learning distributed event representations with a multi-task approach', 'bo': 'བྱ་འགུལ་མང་ཆེ་བ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་གྲངས་སུ་འཇུག་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་རྟོགས་པ'}
{'en': 'Human world knowledge contains information about prototypical events and their participants and locations. In this paper, we train the first models using multi-task learning that can both predict missing event participants and also perform semantic role classification based on semantic plausibility. Our best-performing model is an improvement over the previous state-of-the-art on thematic fit modelling tasks. The event embeddings learned by the model can additionally be used effectively in an event similarity task, also outperforming the state-of-the-art.', 'ar': 'تحتوي معرفة العالم البشري على معلومات حول الأحداث النموذجية والمشاركين فيها والمواقع. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتدريب النماذج الأولى باستخدام التعلم متعدد المهام الذي يمكن أن يتنبأ بالمشاركين المفقودين في الحدث وأيضًا تصنيف الأدوار الدلالية بناءً على المعقولية الدلالية. يعد نموذجنا الأفضل أداءً بمثابة تحسين على أحدث طراز في مهام النمذجة الموضوعية الملائمة. يمكن أيضًا استخدام حفلات الزفاف التي يتعلمها النموذج بشكل فعال في مهمة تشابه الحدث ، والتي تتفوق أيضًا على أحدث طراز.', 'es': 'El conocimiento del mundo humano contiene información sobre eventos prototípicos y sus participantes y ubicaciones. En este artículo, entrenamos los primeros modelos utilizando el aprendizaje multitarea que puede predecir los participantes de eventos faltantes y también realizar una clasificación semántica de roles basada en la plausibilidad semántica. Nuestro modelo de mejor rendimiento es una mejora con respecto al estado anterior de las tareas temáticas de modelado de ajuste. Las incrustaciones de eventos aprendidas por el modelo también se pueden utilizar de manera efectiva en una tarea de similitud de eventos, superando también al estado de la técnica.', 'pt': 'O conhecimento do mundo humano contém informações sobre eventos prototípicos e seus participantes e locais. Neste artigo, treinamos os primeiros modelos usando aprendizado multitarefa que pode prever participantes de eventos ausentes e também realizar classificação de papéis semânticos com base na plausibilidade semântica. Nosso modelo de melhor desempenho é uma melhoria em relação ao estado da arte anterior em tarefas de modelagem de ajuste temático. As incorporações de eventos aprendidas pelo modelo também podem ser usadas efetivamente em uma tarefa de similaridade de eventos, superando também o estado da arte.', 'fr': "La connaissance du monde humain contient des informations sur les événements prototypiques, leurs participants et leurs lieux. Dans cet article, nous formons les premiers modèles à l'aide de l'apprentissage multitâche qui peut à la fois prédire les participants absents à un événement et effectuer une classification sémantique des rôles basée sur la plausibilité sémantique. Notre modèle le plus performant est une amélioration par rapport à l'état actuel des tâches de modélisation d'ajustement thématique. Les intégrations d'événements apprises par le modèle peuvent en outre être utilisées efficacement dans une tâche de similarité d'événements, surpassant ainsi les performances les plus récentes.", 'ja': 'ヒューマンワールドの知識には、プロトタイプイベントとその参加者と場所に関する情報が含まれています。本稿では、欠落しているイベント参加者を予測し、意味論的妥当性に基づく意味論的役割分類も行うことができるマルチタスク学習を用いて、最初のモデルを訓練する。当社の最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するモデルは、従来の最先端のテーマフィットモデリングタスクよりも改善されています。モデルによって学習されたイベント埋め込みは、イベント類似性タスクでさらに効果的に使用することができ、最先端のタスクよりも優れています。', 'zh': '人世知含典刑事及参与者位信息。 本文,我用多任务学习首模,既可以占阙失之事参与者,亦可以语义合理性行语义角色之类。 我们最先进的主题拟合建模务的改进。 模形学事嵌相似性事,优于先进之功。', 'hi': 'मानव विश्व ज्ञान में प्रोटोटाइपिकल घटनाओं और उनके प्रतिभागियों और स्थानों के बारे में जानकारी होती है। इस पेपर में, हम मल्टी-टास्क लर्निंग का उपयोग करके पहले मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं जो दोनों लापता घटना प्रतिभागियों की भविष्यवाणी कर सकते हैं और शब्दार्थ तर्कसंगतता के आधार पर शब्दार्थ भूमिका वर्गीकरण भी कर सकते हैं। हमारा सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन मॉडल विषयगत फिट मॉडलिंग कार्यों पर पिछले राज्य के अत्याधुनिक पर एक सुधार है। मॉडल द्वारा सीखी गई घटना एम्बेडिंग को एक घटना समानता कार्य में भी प्रभावी ढंग से उपयोग किया जा सकता है, जो अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन भी करता है।', 'ru': 'Знания о человеческом мире содержат информацию о прототипических событиях, их участниках и местах проведения. В этой статье мы обучаем первые модели, используя многозадачное обучение, которое может как предсказывать отсутствующих участников события, так и выполнять семантическую классификацию ролей на основе семантической правдоподобия. Наша наиболее эффективная модель является улучшением по сравнению с предыдущими задачами моделирования соответствия по темам. Вложения событий, изученные моделью, могут быть дополнительно эффективно использованы в задаче сходства событий, также превосходящих современные.', 'ga': 'Tá eolas ar an domhan daonna faisnéis faoi imeachtaí fréamhshamhla agus a rannpháirtithe agus láithreacha. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid oiliúint ar na chéad mhúnlaí trí úsáid a bhaint as foghlaim ilthasc lenar féidir rannpháirtithe na n-imeachtaí atá ar iarraidh a thuar agus freisin aicmiú róil shéimeantach a dhéanamh bunaithe ar inchreidteacht shéimeantach. Is feabhas é an tsamhail is fearr a fheidhmíonn againn ná an ceann is déanaí ar thascanna samhaltaithe feisteas téamach. Is féidir úsáid éifeachtach a bhaint as an leabú imeachtaí a d’fhoghlaim an tsamhail freisin i dtasc cosúlachta imeachta, rud a sháraíonn an ceann is nua-aimseartha.', 'el': 'Η γνώση του ανθρώπινου κόσμου περιέχει πληροφορίες σχετικά με πρωτότυπα γεγονότα και τους συμμετέχοντες και τις τοποθεσίες τους. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εκπαιδεύουμε τα πρώτα μοντέλα χρησιμοποιώντας εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών που μπορούν τόσο να προβλέψουν τους συμμετέχοντες που λείπουν όσο και να εκτελέσουν σημασιολογική ταξινόμηση ρόλων με βάση τη σημασιολογική αξιοπιστία. Το μοντέλο μας με τις καλύτερες επιδόσεις είναι μια βελτίωση έναντι της προηγούμενης τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε θέματα μοντελοποίησης προσαρμογής. Οι ενσωματώσεις γεγονότων που μαθαίνονται από το μοντέλο μπορούν επιπλέον να χρησιμοποιηθούν αποτελεσματικά σε μια εργασία ομοιότητας γεγονότων, επίσης ξεπερνώντας την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας.', 'ka': 'ადამიანის მსოფლიო ცნობიერების შესახებ ინფორმაცია პროტოტიპური მოვლენების შესახებ და შესახებ მსოფლიოების შესახებ. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ პირველი მოდელები გავისწავლით, რომელიც მრავალ დავასწავლით, რომელიც შეგვიძლია ორივე წარმოდგენოს მოვლენების მოწყობინებელი და სენმანტიკური პროლის კლასი ჩვენი ყველაზე საუკეთესო მოდელი არის წინა სურათის შესაძლებლობა ტემატიკური მოდელური დავალებისთვის. მოდელზე მეტად სწავლილი მოდელზე შეიძლება ეფექტიურად გამოყენება მოდელს სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა მოდელ', 'hu': 'Az emberi világ ismerete információkat tartalmaz a prototípus eseményekről, résztvevőikről és helyszíneikről. Ebben a tanulmányban az első modelleket többfeladatos tanulás segítségével képezzük, amelyek egyaránt megjósolhatják a hiányzó események résztvevőit, valamint szemantikai valószínűség alapján szemantikai szerepkosztályozást is végezhetnek. A legjobb teljesítményű modellünk javulást jelent a korábbi korszerű tematikus illeszkedési feladatokhoz képest. A modell által megtanult eseménybeágyazások emellett hatékonyan felhasználhatók eseményhasonlósági feladatokban is, a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt is felülmúlva.', 'it': "La conoscenza del mondo umano contiene informazioni su eventi prototipici e sui loro partecipanti e luoghi. In questo articolo, addestriamo i primi modelli utilizzando l'apprendimento multi-task che può sia prevedere i partecipanti agli eventi mancanti che eseguire anche la classificazione semantica dei ruoli basata sulla plausibilità semantica. Il nostro modello più performante è un miglioramento rispetto al precedente stato dell'arte per quanto riguarda le attività di modellazione di fit tematici. Le incorporazioni di eventi apprese dal modello possono inoltre essere utilizzate efficacemente in un compito di somiglianza di eventi, superando anche lo stato dell'arte.", 'lt': 'Žmogaus pasaulio žiniose pateikiama informacija apie prototipinius įvykius ir jų dalyvius bei vietas. Šiame dokumente rengiame pirmuosius modelius naudojant daugiafunkcinį mokymąsi, kuris gali prognozuoti trūkstamus renginių dalyvius ir taip pat atlikti semantinio vaidmens klasifikavimą remiantis semantiniu patikimumu. Our best-performing model is an improvement over the previous state-of-the-art on thematic fit modelling tasks.  Be to, modelio įgytas renginių įtraukimas gali būti veiksmingai naudojamas renginių panašumo užduotyje, taip pat viršijant naujausią padėtį.', 'kk': 'Адам әлемінің білімі прототипиялық оқиғалары мен олардың қатысушылары мен орналасуы туралы мәлімет бар. Бұл қағазда бірінші үлгілерді бірнеше тапсырманың оқытуын қолдану үшін үйренеміз. Бұл оқиға қатысушылардың алдындағы оқиғаларды алдын ала алады және сондай-ақ semantic сенімділікт Біздің ең жақсы істеу үлгіміз - нақышты үлгілеу тапсырмаларының алдыңғы күйін жақсарту. Оқиғалар үлгісінен үйренген құрылғылар оқиғалардың ұқсас тапсырмасында, сондай-ақ әртүрлі күйіне жетпейді.', 'mk': 'Human world knowledge contains information about prototypical events and their participants and locations.  Во овој весник, ги обучуваме првите модели користејќи мултизадачно учење кое може да предвиде исчезнати учесници на настаните и исто така да изврши семантичка класификација на улогата базирана на семантична веројатност. Нашиот најдобар модел е подобрување во однос на претходните најнови задачи за моделирање на тематски способности. Вклучувањето на настаните што го научи моделот може дополнително да се употреби ефикасно во задачата за сличност на настаните, исто така надминувајќи ја најсовремената.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ ലോകത്തിലെ അറിവ് പ്രോട്ടോട്ടിപ്പിക്കല്\u200d സംഭവങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും അവരുടെ പങ്കാളികളെക് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല ജോലി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ആദ്യത്തെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അവയ്ക്ക് കാണാത്ത സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കാളികള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കാന നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന modelling ജോലികളില്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനത്തെക്കാള്\u200d മെച്ച മോഡല്\u200d പഠിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ ഒരു സംഭവത്തിന് തുല്യമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില', 'mt': 'L-għarfien dinji tal-bniedem fih informazzjoni dwar avvenimenti prototipiċi u l-parteċipanti u l-postijiet tagħhom. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nħarrġu l-ewwel mudelli bl-użu ta’ tagħlim multikompitu li jista’ kemm jipprevedi parteċipanti fl-avvenimenti nieqsa kif ukoll iwettaq klassifikazzjoni semantika tar-rwol ibbażata fuq plawżibbiltà semantika. Il-mudell tagħna bl-aħjar prestazzjoni huwa titjib meta mqabbel ma’ dak li kien l-aktar avvanzat fil-ħidmiet tematiċi ta’ mmudellar tal-idoneità. Barra minn hekk, l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-avvenimenti li jitgħallmu mill-mudell jistgħu jintużaw b’mod effettiv f’kompitu ta’ similarità ta’ avvenimenti, li jaqbżu wkoll l-aqwa prestazzjoni.', 'mn': 'Хүн дэлхийн мэдлэг нь анхны үйл явдал, оролцогчдын тухай мэдээллийг агуулдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид анхны загварыг олон ажлын суралцах сургалтыг ашиглан суралцаж, алга болох үйл явдал оролцогчдыг тодорхойлох боломжтой, мөн semantic итгэл итгэлтэй байдлын үндсэн semantic role хуваал Бидний хамгийн шилдэг загвар бол өмнөх урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны хувьд сайжруулалт юм. Загвараар сурсан үйл явдал нь үйл явдлын төстэй үйл явдлын ажил дээр үр дүнтэй хэрэглэгдэж болно. Мөн урлагийн үйл явдлын төстэй үйл явдлын тухай ч үр дүнтэй хэрэглэгдэж болно.', 'ms': 'Pengetahuan dunia manusia mengandungi maklumat mengenai peristiwa prototipik dan peserta dan lokasi mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kita melatih model pertama menggunakan pembelajaran multi-tugas yang kedua-duanya boleh meramalkan peserta peristiwa hilang dan juga melakukan klasifikasi peranan semantik berdasarkan kepercayaan semantik. Model terbaik kami adalah peningkatan atas keadaan-state-of-the-art terdahulu pada tugas pemodelan sesuai tema. Pencampuran peristiwa yang dipelajari oleh model boleh digunakan secara efektif dalam tugas persamaan peristiwa, juga melampaui kemajuan.', 'pl': 'Wiedza świata ludzkiego zawiera informacje o prototypowych wydarzeniach oraz ich uczestnikach i lokalizacjach. W niniejszym artykule szkolimy pierwsze modele wykorzystujące wielozadaniowe uczenie się, które mogą zarówno przewidywać brakujących uczestników zdarzenia, jak i przeprowadzać semantyczną klasyfikację roli w oparciu o wiarygodność semantyczną. Nasz najlepiej wydajny model jest ulepszeniem w stosunku do poprzednich najnowocześniejszych zadań w zakresie modelowania tematycznego dopasowania. Uczone przez model osadzenia zdarzeń mogą być dodatkowo skutecznie wykorzystywane w zadaniu podobieństwa zdarzeń, przewyższając również state-of-the-art.', 'sr': 'Ljudsko svetsko znanje sadrži informacije o prototipičnim događajima i njihovim sudionicima i lokacijama. U ovom papiru treniramo prve modele koristeći učenje multizadataka koji mogu predvidjeti i nestale učesnike događaja i izvršiti semantičku klasifikaciju uloge na temelju semantičke uvjerljivosti. Naš najbolji model je poboljšanje u prethodnom stanju umjetnosti o tematskim odgovarajućim modelima. U slučaju sličnosti, takođe iznosi stanje umjetnosti.', 'ro': 'Cunoașterea lumii umane conține informații despre evenimente prototipice și participanții și locațiile acestora. În această lucrare, vom instrui primele modele folosind învățarea multi-task, care pot atât anticipa participanții lipsă la evenimente, cât și efectua clasificarea semantică a rolurilor bazată pe plauzibilitatea semantică. Modelul nostru cel mai performant este o imbunatatire fata de cele mai recente sarcini de modelare tematica. Încorporările evenimentelor învățate de model pot fi utilizate în plus eficient într-o sarcină de similitudine a evenimentelor, depășind, de asemenea, cele mai moderne.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු ලෝකයේ දන්නවම ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය සහ තැන ගැන තොරතුරු තියෙනවා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි පළමු මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා විශේෂ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ විශ්වාසයෙන් අතුරුදන් වෙන්න පුළු අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය තමයි ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක්. මොඩල් එකෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්ත සිදුවීම් සිදුවීම් සඳහා සිදුවීම් වැඩක් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'no': 'Menneske verdenskunnskap inneheld informasjon om prototypiske hendingar og deltakarane og plasseringar. I denne papiret treng vi dei første modelane med fleire oppgåver som både kan foregå manglende deltakarar på hendingar og også utføra semantisk rollklassifikasjon basert på semantisk uttrykk. Vår beste utføringsmodul er eit forbedring over den førre tilstanden av kunsten på tematilpassande modelleringsoppgåver. Hendingane som er lært av modellen kan tillegg brukast i eit hendingslingsoppgåve, også utfører tilstanden av kunsten.', 'sv': 'Mänsklig världskunskap innehåller information om prototypa händelser och deras deltagare och platser. I denna uppsats tränar vi de första modellerna med hjälp av multi-task learning som både kan förutsäga saknade evenemangsdeltagare och även utföra semantisk rollklassificering baserat på semantisk sannolikhet. Vår bäst presterande modell är en förbättring jämfört med tidigare state-of-the-art när det gäller tematiska passformsmodelleringsuppgifter. De händelseinbäddningar som lärts av modellen kan dessutom användas effektivt i en händelseliknande uppgift, även överträffa den senaste tekniken.', 'ta': 'Human world knowledge contains information about prototypical events and their participants and locations.  இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் பல பணி கற்றுக்கொள்ள முதல் மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்து கொண்டிருக்கிறோம். நிகழ்வு கூட்டாளிகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள எங்கள் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் மாதிரி முந்தைய நிலையில் முன்னேற்றத்திற்கு முன்னேற்றத்திற்கு முன்னேற்றத்த @ info: whatsthis', 'so': 'Aqoonta dadka waxaad ka heleysaa macluumaad ku saabsan dhacdooyinka tusaale ahaan iyo kuwa ka qayb qaata iyo meelahooda. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku tababarinnaa modelalka ugu horeeya oo isticmaalaya waxbarashada shaqo badan, taas oo ka sii sheegi kara kuwa ka qayb gala dhacdooyinka islamarkaasna sameyn karnaa fasalka qayb-qayb ah oo ku saleysan tababarka semantika. Tusaale-sameynta ugu wanaagsan waa hagaajinta xaaladdii hore ee farshaxanta ku saabsan shaqooyinka sameynta tiyaatarka. The event embeddings learned by the model can additionally be used effectively in an event similarity task, also outperforming the state-of-the-art.', 'ur': 'انسان کی دنیا کے علم میں پروٹوٹیپیٹ اتفاقات اور ان کے شرکت کرنے والوں اور جگہ کے بارے میں معلومات ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلی موڈل کو multi-task learning کے مطابق تطالب کرتے ہیں جو دونوں گم ہونے والی حادثہ حاصل کرنے والوں کو پیش بینی کر سکتے ہیں اور سیمانٹی رول کا کلاسیفوں کو بھی کام کرسکتے ہیں۔ ہمارا بہترین نمونڈل یہ ہے کہ پہلے کی حالت-آرت کے ذریعے تئمیٹی فیٹ نمونڈ کے کاموں پر بہترین ترقی ہے. موڈل کے ذریعہ سیکھا ہوا ایڈینگ اضافہ کے ساتھ ایک ایڈینٹی برابری کے کام میں استعمال کر سکتا ہے، اور اس کے ساتھ آرتی کی حالت سے بھی زیادہ استعمال کر سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Inson dunyo haqida prototypical events, participants va manzillar haqida maʼlumot mavjud. Bu qogʻozda biz birinchi modellarni bir necha vazifa o'rganish bilan o'rganamiz. Bu hodisa ta'minlovchilarni oldin oldinga o'rganish mumkin va qaytamik plausiyatiga asoslangan semantik darajasini bajaramiz. Bizning eng yaxshi bajarish modelimizning oldingi shaxsiy holatda o'zgarishni o'zgartirish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Kiến thức thế giới con người chứa thông tin về các sự kiện mẫu điển hình. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đào tạo các mẫu đầu bằng việc học nhiều nhiệm vụ có thể dự đoán các diễn viên mất tích và cũng thực hiện các phân hạng các chức năng theo ngữ pháp. Cách làm tốt nhất của chúng ta là cải tiến tiến tiến tiến tiến trong các công việc mô hình sắc thái. Sự tổ hợp các sự kiện được học bởi mô hình cũng có thể được sử dụng hiệu quả trong một công việc tương đồng, cũng vượt qua trạng thái hiện đại.', 'da': 'Viden om menneskelig verden indeholder oplysninger om prototype begivenheder og deres deltagere og steder. I denne artikel træner vi de første modeller ved hjælp af multi-task learning, der både kan forudsige manglende begivenhedsdeltagere og også udføre semantisk rolleklassificering baseret på semantisk sandsynlighed. Vores bedst ydende model er en forbedring i forhold til den tidligere state-of-the-art på tematiske pasmodelleringsopgaver. De begivenhedsindlejringer, modellen lærer, kan desuden bruges effektivt i en begivenhedslighedsopgave, også udføre state-of-the-art.', 'nl': 'Menselijke wereldkennis bevat informatie over prototypische evenementen en hun deelnemers en locaties. In dit artikel trainen we de eerste modellen met multitask learning die zowel ontbrekende deelnemers kunnen voorspellen als semantische rolclassificatie kunnen uitvoeren op basis van semantische plausibiliteit. Ons best presterende model is een verbetering ten opzichte van de vorige state-of-the-art op het gebied van thematische fit modellering taken. De gebeurtenisinbeddingen die door het model zijn geleerd, kunnen bovendien effectief worden gebruikt in een gebeurtenisgelijkheidstaak, ook beter presteren dan de state-of-the-art.', 'hr': 'Znanje ljudskih svijeta sadrži informacije o prototipskim događajima i njihovim učesnicima i lokacijama. U ovom papiru treniramo prve modele koristeći učenje multizadataka koji mogu predvidjeti i nestale učesnike događaja i izvršiti semantičku klasifikaciju uloge na temelju semantičke uvjerljivosti. Naš najbolji model je poboljšanje u prethodnom stanju umjetnosti o tematskim odgovarajućim modelima. U zadatku sličnosti događaja mogu se učinkovito koristiti uključeni modelom, također iznosi stanje umjetnosti.', 'bg': 'Познанията за човешкия свят съдържат информация за прототипни събития и техните участници и локации. В тази статия ние обучаваме първите модели, използващи многозадача обучение, които могат както да предвидят липсващите участници в събитието, така и да изпълняват семантична класификация на ролите въз основа на семантична правдоподобност. Нашият най-добър модел е подобрение в сравнение с предишните най-съвременни задачи по тематично моделиране. Вградените събития, научени от модела, могат допълнително да се използват ефективно в задача за сходство на събития, като също така превъзхождат най-съвременните.', 'ko': '인류 세계 지식은 원형 사건과 그 참여자와 위치에 대한 정보를 포함한다.본고에서 우리는 다중 임무 학습 훈련의 첫 번째 모델을 사용한다. 이 모델은 사건 참여자의 부족을 예측할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 의미의 합리성을 바탕으로 의미의 역할 분류를 할 수 있다.우리가 가장 잘 표현한 모델은 주제 매칭 모델링 작업에 있어서 이전의 최신 수준보다 개선된 것이다.이 모델을 통해 배운 이벤트 삽입은 이벤트 유사성 임무에 효과적이고 최신 기술보다 우수하다.', 'de': 'Menschliches Weltwissen enthält Informationen über prototypische Ereignisse und deren Teilnehmer und Orte. In diesem Beitrag trainieren wir die ersten Modelle mit Multi-Task Learning, die sowohl fehlende Event-Teilnehmer vorhersagen als auch semantische Rollenklassifikation basierend auf semantischer Plausibilität durchführen können. Unser leistungsstärkstes Modell ist eine Verbesserung gegenüber dem bisherigen Stand der Technik in Bezug auf thematische Passmodellierungsaufgaben. Die vom Modell erlernten Event-Einbettungen können zusätzlich effektiv in einer Event-Ähnlichkeitsaufgabe eingesetzt werden und übertreffen den Stand der Technik.', 'id': 'Pengetahuan dunia manusia mengandung informasi tentang peristiwa prototipik dan peserta dan lokasi mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kami melatih model pertama menggunakan belajar multi-tugas yang dapat berdua memprediksi peserta peristiwa yang hilang dan juga melakukan klasifikasi peran semantis berdasarkan plausibilitas semantis. Model terbaik kami adalah peningkatan atas kemajuan terakhir dalam tugas model tematis. Pencampuran peristiwa yang dipelajari oleh model dapat secara tambahan digunakan secara efektif dalam tugas persamaan peristiwa, juga melampaui peringkat terbaik.', 'sw': 'Ufahamu wa dunia wa binadamu una taarifa kuhusu matukio ya mfano na washiriki wao na maeneo. Katika karatasi hii, tunafundisha mifano ya kwanza kwa kutumia kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi ambazo zinaweza kutabiri washiriki wa tukio hilo na pia kutekeleza sifa za kimapenzi kwa kutumia uwezekano wa kimapenzi. Mfano wetu bora zaidi wa kutengeneza ni kuboresha hali ya sanaa iliyopita kuhusu kazi za mifano inayofanana. The event embeddings learned by the model can additionally be used effectively in an event similarity task, also outperforming the state-of-the-art.', 'fa': 'دانش جهان انسان اطلاعات در مورد اتفاقات پروتطبیعی و شرکتگران و محل\u200cهای آنها وجود دارد. در این کاغذ، ما اولین مدل\u200cها را با استفاده از یادگیری بسیاری از کار آموزش می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتوانند هر دو پیش بینی کنند که شرکت\u200cکننده\u200cهای اتفاق ناپدید می\u200cشوند و همچنین برنامه\u200cهای نقش\u200cهای semantic را بر اساس قابلیت\u200cهای sem بهترین مدل اجرای ما در مورد وضعیت هنر قبلی در مورد وضعیت مدل\u200cسازی موجود است. این اتفاق\u200cها که توسط مدل یاد گرفته شده\u200cاند، می\u200cتوانند به اضافه\u200cای در یک کار شبیه\u200cای از اتفاق\u200cها استفاده می\u200cشوند، همچنین در حالت هنری\u200cها بیشتر از آن استفاده می\u200cشوند.', 'tr': 'Adamlar dünýäde bilgi prototipi çykyşlar we ýerleri barada maglumatlary bar. Bu kagyzda, biz ilkinji nusgalary köp-täbli öwrenmäge ulanyp öwrenip biljek nusgalary öwrenip bilýäris. Bu nusgada hem ýok bolup geçen nusgalary öwrenip bilýäris we hem semantik ynamlylyk bilen semantik täbligi täbligine daýa Biziň iň gowy eden nusgasymyz tema örän nusgasynda öňki nusgasy üçin gelişmektedir. Model tarapyndan öwrenen çykyşlar ýene-de bir täsirli täsirlerde ulanyp biler, ýöne-de sungatyň durumyny çykaryp biler.', 'af': "Mense wêreld kennis bevat inligting oor prototipies gebeurtenis en hul deelnaders en liggings. In hierdie papier, ons tref die eerste modele deur multi-taak leer te gebruik wat beide kan voorskou die ontbrekende gebeurtenis deelnaders en ook semantiese rol klasifikasie gebaseer op semantiese plaasbaarheid. Ons beste uitvoerde model is 'n verbetering oor die vorige staat-van-kuns op tematike pas modellering taak. @ info: whatsthis", 'sq': 'Njerëzit e njohura botërore përmban informacion rreth ngjarjeve prototipike dhe pjesëmarrësve dhe vendeve të tyre. Në këtë letër, ne trajnojmë modelet e para duke përdorur mësim shumë-detyrash që mund të parashikojnë pjesëmarrësit e humbur të ngjarjes dhe gjithashtu të kryejnë klasifikimin semantik të rolit bazuar në besueshmërinë semantike. Modeli ynë më i mirë performues është një përmirësim ndaj gjendjes së mëparshme në detyrat e modelimit tematik të përshtatshëm. Ndërtesat e ngjarjeve të mësuara nga modeli mund të përdoren në mënyrë shtesë efektive në një detyrë ngjashmërie ngjarjesh, gjithashtu duke kaluar përpara gjendjes së fundit.', 'am': 'የሰው ዓለም እውቀት የፕሮቶግራፊ ጉዳዮች እና ተጋሪዎቻቸው እና ስፍራዎች ላይ መረጃ አላቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የመጀመሪያውን ምሳሌዎች የጎደለው ጉዳዩ ተማሪዎችን እናስተምር ዘንድ የሚችሉትን እና በsemantic plausibility በመሠረት ላይ የsemantic role classification እናደርጋለን፡፡ Our best-performing model is an improvement over the previous state-of-the-art on thematic fit modelling tasks.  በሞዴል የተማረ ጉዳዩ ውስጥ በጉዳዩ ላይ በተጨማሪና በተለያዩ ስራ ላይ ተጠቃሚ ይችላል፣ እና በሀገር-የ-art ስርዓት ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մարդկային աշխարհի գիտելիքները պարունակում են տեղեկատվություն նախատիպիկ իրադարձությունների և նրանց մասնակիցների և տեղադրությունների մասին: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսուցանում ենք առաջին մոդելները օգտագործելով բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրություն, որը կարող է նախատեսել բացակայած իրադարձությունների մասնակիցներին, ինչպես նաև կատարել սեմանտիկ դերի դասակարգում, հիմնված սեմանտիկ հավատ Մեր ամենաարդյունավետ մոդելը թեմատիկական համապատասխանատվության խնդիրների վերաբերյալ բարելավումն է: Մոդելի կողմից սովորված իրադարձությունների ներդրումները կարող են նաև արդյունավետ օգտագործվել իրադարձությունների նմանության խնդիրներում, ինչպես նաև վերջին զարգացումները:', 'az': 'İnsan dünyanın elmi prototipik olaraq, iştirakçiləri və yeri haqqında məlumatlar barəsindədir. Bu kağızda, biz ilk modelləri çoxlu işin öyrənməsi ilə təhsil edirik ki, hər ikisi də yox olaraq iştirakçiləri təmin edə bilər və semantik təvəkkül edə bilər. Bizim ən yaxşı göstərici modellərimiz tema uyğun modellik işlərində əvvəlki məlumatın vəziyyətində daha yaxşılıqdır. Modelin öyrəndiyi olaraq qurbanlıqlar daha faydalı olaraq istifadə edilə bilər, həmçin in-sanatın vəziyyətini də üstün edə bilər.', 'bn': 'মানুষের বিশ্ব জ্ঞান রয়েছে প্রোটোটিপিকেল ঘটনা এবং তাদের অংশগ্রহণকারীদের এবং স্থান সম্পর্কে তথ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা অনেক কাজ শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে প্রথম মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ দিচ্ছি যা উভয়েই ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করতে পারে যে অনুষ্ঠানের অংশগ্রহণকা আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনীর মডেল হচ্ছে পূর্ববর্তী স্টেট-অফ-শিল্পের ক্ষেত্রে উন্নয়ন। মডেলের দ্বারা শিক্ষিত অনুষ্ঠানের অনুষ্ঠান অনুষ্ঠানের মাধ্যমে কার্যকর করে একটি অনুষ্ঠানের একই কাজে ব্যবহার করা যাবে, এবং সাথে সা', 'ca': "El coneixement del món humà conté informació sobre esdeveniments prototípics i els seus participants i llocs. En aquest article, entrenem els primers models fent servir aprenentatge multitascat que pot predir els participants en esdeveniments desapareguts i també fer una classificació semàntica del paper basada en la plausibilitat semàntica. El nostre model de millor rendiment és una millora en comparació amb l'última tasca de modelació temàtica. L'incorporació d'esdeveniments aprenguta pel model es pot utilitzar efectivament en una tasca de similitud d'esdeveniments, també superant l'última tasca.", 'cs': 'Znalosti lidského světa obsahují informace o prototypických událostech a jejich účastnících a místech. V tomto článku trénujeme první modely využívající multi-tasking learning, které umí jak predikovat chybějící účastníky události, tak provádět sémantickou klasifikaci rolí založenou na sémantické věrohodnosti. Náš nejlépe výkonný model je vylepšením oproti předchozím nejmodernějším úkolům v oblasti tematického modelování fit. Vložení událostí zjištěné modelem lze navíc efektivně využít v úkolu podobnosti událostí, který také překonává nejmodernější stav techniky.', 'et': 'Inimmaailma teadmised sisaldavad teavet prototüüpiliste sündmuste ning nende osalejate ja asukohtade kohta. Käesolevas töös koolitame esimesi mudeleid, mis kasutavad mitmeülesandelist õppimist, mis suudavad nii ennustada kadunud sündmuste osalejaid kui ka teostada semantilist rolli klassifikatsiooni semantilise usutavuse põhjal. Meie parimaid tulemusi pakkuv mudel on täiendus võrreldes eelmise tipptasemel temaatilise sobivuse modelleerimise ülesannetega. Mudeliga õppitud sündmuste manustamist saab täiendavalt efektiivselt kasutada sündmuste sarnasuse ülesandes, ületades ka tehnika taseme.', 'bs': 'Znanje ljudskih svijeta sadrži informacije o prototipskim događajima i njihovim učesnicima i lokacijama. U ovom papiru treniramo prve modele koristeći učenje multizadataka koji mogu predvidjeti i nestale učesnike događaja i izvršiti semantičku klasifikaciju uloge na temelju semantičke uvjerljivosti. Naš najbolji model je poboljšanje u prethodnom stanju umjetnosti o tematskim odgovarajućim modelima. U zadatku sličnosti događaja, također iznosi stanje umjetnosti.', 'fi': 'Ihmisen maailmantuntemus sisältää tietoa prototyypillisistä tapahtumista sekä niiden osallistujista ja sijainneista. Tässä työssä koulutamme ensimmäiset monitehtäväoppimista hyödyntävät mallit, jotka pystyvät sekä ennustamaan puuttuvia tapahtumaosallistujia että suorittamaan semanttiseen uskottavuuteen perustuvan rooliluokituksen. Parhaiten suoriutuva mallimme on parannus aikaisempaan huipputekniikkaan verrattuna temaattisen sovituksen mallinnustehtävissä. Mallin avulla opittuja tapahtumaupotuksia voidaan lisäksi hyödyntää tehokkaasti tapahtumasamankaltaisuustehtävässä, mikä on myös huipputasoa parempi.', 'sk': 'Znanje o človeškem svetu vsebuje informacije o prototipnih dogodkih ter njihovih udeležencih in lokacijah. V prispevku usposabljamo prve modele z večopravilnim učenjem, ki lahko napovedujejo manjkajoče udeležence dogodka in opravljajo tudi semantično klasifikacijo vlog na podlagi semantične verjetnosti. Naš najboljši model je izboljšanje v primerjavi s prejšnjimi najsodobnejšimi nalogami modeliranja tematskega prilagajanja. Vgradnje dogodkov, ki se jih nauči model, se lahko dodatno učinkovito uporabljajo pri nalogi podobnosti dogodkov in tudi presegajo najsodobnejše.', 'jv': "Awal sing wong liyane kabèh informasi ning events prototipik karo pawartos nang kana Nang kuwi iki, kita luwih akeh model sing sampeyan inukak multi-task sampeyan nguasai perbudhakan winih Tema-sing paling nggawe barang pengguna kuwi dianggap kanggo kowe mesthi 'state-of-the-arts' sing berarti dadi nyong. embedding", 'he': 'הידע בעולם האנושי מכיל מידע על אירועים פרוטיפיים והמשתתפים והמקומות שלהם. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מאמן את הדוגמנים הראשונים באמצעות לימוד ממשימים רבים שיכולים גם לחזות משתתפים אירועים חסרים וגם לבצע שיעור תפקידים סמנטיים מבוסס על אמינות סמנטית. המודל הטוב ביותר שלנו הוא שיפור מעל המצב המיוחד הקודם על משימות מודל נושאיות. תוספות האירועים שנלמדו על ידי המודל יכולות להשתמש באופן נוסף בתפקיד דומה לאירועים, וגם להעביר את המצב החדש.', 'ha': "Sunan sani ga mutum yana da information about shiryoyin ayuka da kuma shirin su da wurãren aiki. Ga wannan takardan, Munã kõre misãlai na farko da Muke amfani da amfani da learning masu aiki mai yawa, wanda za su iya yi bayani ga shirin ayuka da ba'a ɓace ba, kuma suna samun classifori na semantic a kan fasalin na semantic. Babu mafarin mafarin sami-sami shine mafiya kyau a kan halin-na-gaba kan aikin misalin ayuka da aka fito. @ action: button", 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདིར་སྐྱེས་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་གནས་ཚ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མིག་གཟུགས་རྩོལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཏེ། ང་ཚོའི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ནི་སྔོན་མའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཕར་རིས་བརྟན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཡོད། བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་མ་དབུགས་གྱིས་ཤེས་པའི་འཇུག་སྣོད་དེ་ལས་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Assessing Meaning Components in German Complex Verbs : A Collection of Source-Target Domains and Directionality', 'ar': 'تقييم مكونات المعنى في الأفعال المعقدة الألمانية: مجموعة من المجالات المستهدفة المصدر والاتجاه', 'fr': 'Évaluation des composantes de signification dans les verbes complexes allemands\xa0: une collection de domaines source-cible et de directionnalité', 'es': 'Evaluación de los componentes del significado en los verbos complejos alemanes: una colección de dominios fuente-destino y direccionalidad', 'pt': 'Avaliando componentes de significado em verbos complexos alemães: uma coleção de domínios de origem-alvo e direcionalidade', 'ja': 'ドイツ語の複雑な動詞における意味成分の評価：ソースターゲットドメインと方向性のコレクション', 'zh': '评估德语杂动词之义组件:原向域与方向性合', 'hi': 'जर्मन जटिल क्रियाओं में अर्थ घटकों का आकलन: स्रोत-लक्ष्य डोमेन और दिशात्मकता का एक संग्रह', 'ru': 'Оценка смысловых компонентов в сложных немецких глаголах: коллекция исходных и целевых доменов и направленность', 'ga': "Comhpháirteanna Brí a Mheas i Briathra Coimpléascacha Gearmánacha: Cnuasach d'Fearainn-Sprioc-Sprioc agus Treoúlacht", 'ka': 'მინიშვნელოვანი კომპონენტები გერმანეთის კომპლექსი გერბში: მინიშვნელოვანების კოლექციაName', 'hu': 'Jelentőkomponensek értékelése német komplex igékben: Forrás-cél tartományok és irányítás gyűjteménye', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση των σημασιολογικών συστατικών στα γερμανικά σύνθετα ρήματα: Μια συλλογή τομέων πηγής-στόχου και κατεύθυνσης', 'it': 'Valutazione dei componenti di significato in verbi complessi tedeschi: una raccolta di domini e direzionalità sorgente-target', 'kk': 'Неміс комплекс тіркемелердегі орташа компоненттерді оқу: көзі- мақсатты домендерді және бағытты жинақтау', 'mk': 'Оценка на значењето на компонентите во германските комплексни реченици: собирање на домени од изворот и насока', 'lt': 'Vokietijos sudėtinių žodžių reikšmės komponentų vertinimas: šaltinio tikslinių sričių rinkinys ir kryptis', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Komponen Bermakna dalam Verb Kompleks Jerman: Koleksi Domain Sumber-Sasaran dan Kearahan', 'ml': 'ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d കോമ്പ്ലെക്സ് വെര്\u200dബുകളില്\u200d അര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ഘടകം', 'mn': 'Германы комплекс хэлбэрийн утгын компонентүүдийг үнэлэх: A Collection of Source-Target Domains and Directionality', 'mt': 'Il-Valutazzjoni tal-Komponenti tat-tifsira fil-Verbi Kumplessi Ġermaniżi: Ġbir ta’ Dominji u Direzzjonalità tal-Għan tas-Sors', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Ocena składników znaczeniowych w niemieckich czasownikach złożonych: zbiór domen źródłowo-docelowych i kierunkowość', 'ro': 'Evaluarea componentelor semnificative în verbe complexe germane: o colecție de domenii sursă-țintă și direcționalitate', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje značajnih komponenta u njemačkim kompleksnim verbama: kolekcija domena izvora-ciljeva i direktionalnosti', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Bedömning av meningskomponenter i tyska komplexa verb: En samling av käll-måldomäner och riktighet', 'so': 'Assessing Components in German Complex Verbs: A Collection of Source-Target Domains and Directionality', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'جرمن مکملکس ورب میں معنی رغتوں کی آزمائش: سورج-Target دامین اور دئیرٹیونیٹ کا ایک مجموعہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh giá thành phần Ý trong các tập hợp phức tạp Đức: A collection of Source-Target Dome and directality', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje značajnih komponenta u njemačkim kompleksnim verbama: Skupljanje domena izvora-ciljeva i Direktionalnosti', 'nl': 'Het beoordelen van betekeniscomponenten in Duitse complexe werkwoorden: een verzameling brondoeldomeinen en directionaliteit', 'da': 'Vurdering af betydningskomponenter i tyske komplekse verber: En samling af kilde-måldomæner og retning', 'bg': 'Оценка на компонентите на значението в немските комплексни глаголи: колекция от източник-целеви домейни и посока', 'ko': '독일어 복합동사의 의미 성분 평가: 원-목표역과 방향성의 집합', 'de': 'Bewertung von Bedeutungskomponenten in deutschen komplexen Verben: Eine Sammlung von Quell-Ziel-Domänen und Richtungen', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi Komponen Berarti dalam Verb Kompleks Jerman: Sebuah Koleksi Domain Sumber-Target dan Direktivitas', 'sw': 'Makampuni yanayomaanisha katika Verbs za komplekta ya Ujerumani: Mkusanyiko wa Mamlaka na Uelekezaji', 'fa': 'ارزیابی بخش\u200cهای معنی در ورب\u200cهای کامل آلمانی: یک مجموعه دامنهای منبع- هدف و مستقیم', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Almanyň kompleks werplarynda maýdança komponentleri barlama: A Collection of Source-Target Domains and Directionality', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'hy': 'Գերմանական բարդ բայերի իմաստային կոմպոնենտների գնահատումը. աղբյուր-նպատակային դաշտերի հավաքածու և ուղղություն', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i përbërësve me kuptim në fjalët komplekse gjermane: Një koleksion i domeneve burimi-objektiv dhe drejtimi', 'bn': 'জার্মান কমপ্লেক্স ভার্বের মানে মানের অংশ: উৎস- টার্গেট ডোমেন এবং ডিরেক্টশনিলিটির একটি সংগ্রহ', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje značajnih komponenta u njemačkim kompleksnim verbama: Skupljanje domena izvora-ciljeva i direktivnosti', 'ca': 'Evaluar els components significatius en verbs complexos alemanys: Una col·lecció de dominis de fonts-objectius i direccionalitat', 'az': 'Almanca Complex Verbs içindəki İmparatı Komponentlərini Assessment: A Collection of Source-Target Domains and Directionality', 'cs': 'Hodnocení významných složek v německých slovesích: Sbírka zdrojových a cílových domén a směrovosti', 'fi': 'Merkityskomponenttien arviointi saksankielisissä monimutkaisissa verbeissä: kokoelma lähde-kohdeverkkotunnuksia ja suuntaviivoja', 'et': 'Saksa keeruliste verbide tähenduskomponentide hindamine: allika-sihtdomeenide ja suunatuse kogum', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ocenjevanje pomenskih komponent v nemških kompleksnih glagolih: zbirka izvorno-ciljnih domen in usmerjenosti', 'he': 'הערכה של מרכיבים משמעותיים במילים מורכבות גרמניות: אוסף של שדות מקור-מטרה והכיוון', 'bo': 'Assessing Meaning Components in German Complex Verbs: A Collection of Source-Target Domains and Directionality'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a collection to assess meaning components in German complex verbs, which frequently undergo meaning shifts. We use a novel strategy to obtain source and target domain characterisations via sentence generation rather than sentence annotation. A selection of arrows adds spatial directional information to the generated contexts. We provide a broad qualitative description of the dataset, and a series of standard classification experiments verifies the quantitative reliability of the presented resource. The setup for collecting the meaning components is applicable also to other languages, regarding complex verbs as well as other language-specific targets that involve meaning shifts.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة مجموعة لتقييم مكونات المعنى في الأفعال الألمانية المعقدة ، والتي كثيرًا ما تخضع لتغييرات المعنى. نحن نستخدم استراتيجية جديدة للحصول على توصيفات المجال المصدر والهدف من خلال إنشاء الجملة بدلاً من شرح الجملة. يضيف تحديد الأسهم معلومات اتجاهية مكانية إلى السياقات التي تم إنشاؤها. نحن نقدم وصفًا نوعيًا واسعًا لمجموعة البيانات ، وتتحقق سلسلة من تجارب التصنيف القياسي من الموثوقية الكمية للمورد المقدم. الإعداد لجمع مكونات المعنى قابل للتطبيق أيضًا على اللغات الأخرى ، فيما يتعلق بالأفعال المعقدة بالإضافة إلى الأهداف الأخرى الخاصة باللغة التي تتضمن تحولات المعنى.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une collection visant à évaluer les composantes de signification des verbes complexes allemands, qui subissent fréquemment des changements de sens. Nous utilisons une nouvelle stratégie pour obtenir des caractérisations de domaines source et cible via la génération de phrases plutôt que par l'annotation de phrases. Une sélection de flèches ajoute des informations directionnelles spatiales aux contextes générés. Nous fournissons une description qualitative large de l'ensemble de données, et une série d'expériences de classification standard vérifie la fiabilité quantitative de la ressource présentée. La configuration de collecte des composants de signification s'applique également à d'autres langues, en ce qui concerne les verbes complexes ainsi que d'autres cibles spécifiques à une langue qui impliquent des changements de sens.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta uma coleção para avaliar componentes de significado em verbos complexos alemães, que frequentemente sofrem mudanças de significado. Usamos uma nova estratégia para obter caracterizações de domínio de origem e destino por meio de geração de sentenças em vez de anotação de sentenças. Uma seleção de setas adiciona informações espaciais direcionais aos contextos gerados. Fornecemos uma ampla descrição qualitativa do conjunto de dados e uma série de experimentos de classificação padrão verificam a confiabilidade quantitativa do recurso apresentado. A configuração para coletar os componentes de significado também é aplicável a outros idiomas, em relação a verbos complexos, bem como a outros alvos específicos do idioma que envolvem mudanças de significado.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta una colección para evaluar los componentes del significado de los verbos complejos alemanes, que con frecuencia sufren cambios de significado. Utilizamos una estrategia novedosa para obtener caracterizaciones de los dominios fuente y destino mediante la generación de oraciones en lugar de la anotación de oraciones. Una selección de flechas añade información direccional espacial a los contextos generados. Proporcionamos una descripción cualitativa amplia del conjunto de datos y una serie de experimentos de clasificación estándar verifica la confiabilidad cuantitativa del recurso presentado. La configuración para recopilar los componentes de significado también es aplicable a otros idiomas, con respecto a los verbos complejos, así como a otros objetivos específicos del idioma que implican cambios de significado.', 'ja': '本論文では、意味変化を頻繁に受けるドイツ語の複雑な動詞における意味成分を評価するためのコレクションを紹介する。私たちは、文章注釈ではなく、文章生成を介してソースおよびターゲットドメインの特徴付けを取得するために新規の戦略を使用します。矢印の選択は、生成されたコンテキストに空間的方向性情報を追加する。当社は、データセットの広範な定性的説明を提供し、一連の標準分類実験は、提示されたリソースの定量的信頼性を検証します。意味構成要素を収集するための設定は、複雑な動詞および意味のシフトを伴う他の言語固有のターゲットに関して、他の言語にも適用可能である。', 'zh': '本文供一集合,以质德语杂动词之义,动词常经义转换。 吾用一新策,句成非句注。 择箭添空上下文。 备数集之广定性,列准类实验,验其定可靠性。 集义组件设亦宜他语,涉复杂动词及转换者特定他语。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर जर्मन जटिल क्रियाओं में अर्थ घटकों का आकलन करने के लिए एक संग्रह प्रस्तुत करता है, जो अक्सर अर्थ परिवर्तनों से गुजरते हैं। हम वाक्य एनोटेशन के बजाय वाक्य पीढ़ी के माध्यम से स्रोत और लक्ष्य डोमेन विशेषताओं को प्राप्त करने के लिए एक उपन्यास रणनीति का उपयोग करते हैं। तीरों का चयन उत्पन्न संदर्भों में स्थानिक दिशात्मक जानकारी जोड़ता है। हम डेटासेट का एक व्यापक गुणात्मक विवरण प्रदान करते हैं, और मानक वर्गीकरण प्रयोगों की एक श्रृंखला प्रस्तुत संसाधन की मात्रात्मक विश्वसनीयता की पुष्टि करती है। अर्थ घटकों को इकट्ठा करने के लिए सेटअप अन्य भाषाओं पर भी लागू होता है, जटिल क्रियाओं के साथ-साथ अन्य भाषा-विशिष्ट लक्ष्यों के बारे में जो अर्थ बदलाव शामिल करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлен сборник для оценки смысловых компонентов в немецких сложных глаголах, которые часто претерпевают изменения смысла. Мы используем новую стратегию для получения характеристик исходного и целевого домена посредством создания предложения, а не аннотации предложения. Выбор стрелок добавляет пространственную информацию о направлении к сгенерированным контекстам. Мы даем широкое качественное описание набора данных, а серия стандартных классификационных экспериментов проверяет количественную достоверность представленного ресурса. Настройка для сбора компонентов смысла применима также к другим языкам, в отношении сложных глаголов, а также других языковых целей, которые включают в себя сдвиги смысла.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo cnuasach i láthair chun measúnú a dhéanamh ar chomhpháirteanna brí i mbriathra casta Gearmánacha, a ndéantar athruithe brí orthu go minic. Bainimid úsáid as straitéis nua chun tréithrithe fearainn foinse agus spriocdhírithe a fháil trí phianbhreith a ghiniúint seachas anótáil abairtí. Cuireann rogha saigheada faisnéis treo spásúil leis na comhthéacsanna ginte. Cuirimid cur síos cáilíochtúil leathan ar an tacar sonraí, agus fíoraíonn sraith de thurgnaimh chaighdeánaigh aicmithe iontaofacht chainníochtúil na hacmhainne a chuirtear i láthair. Tá an socrú chun na comhpháirteanna brí a bhailiú infheidhme freisin maidir le teangacha eile, maidir le briathra casta chomh maith le spriocanna eile a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga lena mbaineann aistrithe brí.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy gyűjteményt mutat be a német komplex igék jelentőkomponenseinek felmérésére, amelyek gyakran jelentőváltozáson mennek keresztül. Új stratégiát alkalmazunk arra, hogy a forrás- és céltartományi jellemzőket mondatok generálásával szerezzük meg, nem pedig mondatok jegyzetelésével. A nyilak kiválasztása térbeli irányítási információkat ad a generált kontextusokhoz. Az adatkészlet széles körű minőségi leírását nyújtjuk, és szabványos osztályozási kísérletek sorozata ellenőrzi a bemutatott erőforrás mennyiségi megbízhatóságát. A jelentéskomponensek összegyűjtésének beállítása más nyelvekre is alkalmazható, komplex igékre, valamint más nyelvspecifikus célkitűzésekre is, amelyek jelentésváltozásokkal járnak.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια συλλογή για την αξιολόγηση των εννοιακών συστατικών στα γερμανικά σύνθετα ρήματα, τα οποία συχνά υφίστανται μεταβολές νοήματος. Χρησιμοποιούμε μια νέα στρατηγική για να αποκτήσουμε χαρακτηρισμούς πηγής και στόχου μέσω δημιουργίας προτάσεων και όχι σχολιασμού προτάσεων. Μια επιλογή βέλους προσθέτει χωρικές κατευθυντικές πληροφορίες στα παραγόμενα πλαίσια. Παρέχουμε μια ευρεία ποιοτική περιγραφή του συνόλου δεδομένων και μια σειρά από τυποποιημένα πειράματα ταξινόμησης επαληθεύει την ποσοτική αξιοπιστία του παρουσιαζόμενου πόρου. Η ρύθμιση για τη συλλογή των εννοιακών συστατικών εφαρμόζεται και σε άλλες γλώσσες, όσον αφορά πολύπλοκα ρήματα καθώς και άλλους γλωσσικούς στόχους που περιλαμβάνουν αλλαγές εννοιών.', 'ka': 'ეს დომენტის კომპლექსიკური ვებრებში, რომელიც მხოლოდ გავაკეთება ნიშნავს ცვლილება. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ნომალური სტრატიგია, რომელიც მიიღებთ წიგნის და მიზედომის დემომინის კარიქტრიქტრებების მიხედვით წიგნის შემდეგ, არც წი პარამეტრების მონიშნულება შექმნილი კონტექსტებში შორის დირექციონალური ინფორმაციას დამატებს. მონაცემების უფრო კვალიტატიური გამოსახულება და სტანდარტული კლასიფიკაციის ექსპერიმენტების სერიონი შევცვალობა მონაცემებული რესურსის კვალტატიური დარწმ კომპლექტური გერბების შესახებ და სხვა ენების შესახებ სხვა მნიშვნელობის კომპონენტების კომპონენტების შესახებ, და სხვა ენის სპექტური მიზეზი, რომელიც', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta una raccolta per valutare le componenti di significato nei verbi complessi tedeschi, che spesso subiscono cambiamenti di significato. Usiamo una nuova strategia per ottenere la caratterizzazione del dominio sorgente e target tramite la generazione di frasi piuttosto che annotazione di frasi. Una selezione di frecce aggiunge informazioni direzionali spaziali ai contesti generati. Forniamo un'ampia descrizione qualitativa del set di dati e una serie di esperimenti di classificazione standard verifica l'affidabilità quantitativa della risorsa presentata. L'impostazione per la raccolta dei componenti del significato è applicabile anche ad altre lingue, per quanto riguarda verbi complessi e altri target specifici del linguaggio che comportano cambiamenti di significato.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas rinkinys, skirtas įvertinti reikšmingas Vokietijos sudėtingų žodžių sudedamąsias dalis, kurios dažnai keičiasi reikšme. Naujame naują strategiją, kad gautume šaltinio ir tikslinės srities apibūdinimus sukuriant sakinius, o ne komentuojant sakinius. Atrinkus strėles į sukurtus kontekstus pridedama erdvinio krypties informacija. Pateikiame platų kokybinį duomenų rinkinio aprašymą ir keletas standartinių klasifikavimo eksperimentų patvirtina pateiktų išteklių kiekybinį patikimumą. Sąvokų komponentų rinkimo sistema taikoma ir kitoms kalboms, susijusioms su sudėtingais žodžiais ir kitais kalboms būdingais tikslais, susijusiais su reikšmės pokyčiais.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува колекција за проценка на значењето на компонентите во германските комплексни реченици, кои честопати претрпуваат промени на значењето. Ние користиме нова стратегија за да добиеме карактеризации на изворот и цел домен преку генерација на реченици наместо анотација на реченици. Селекција на стрели додава просторски информации во генерираните контексти. Ние обезбедуваме широк квалитетен опис на податоците, и серија стандардни експерименти за класификација ја верификуваат квантитивната доверливост на презентираниот ресурс. Поставувањето за собирање на значењето на компонентите се применува и на другите јазици, во однос на комплексните јазици, како и на другите јазички специфични цели кои вклучуваат промени на значењето.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз неміс комплекс вербаларының маңызды компоненттерін оқу үшін жинақтауын көрсетеді. Бұл көбінде мәліметті өзгерту үшін көбінде болады. Біз сөздерді құру арқылы көзі мен мақсатты доменнің сипаттамасын алу үшін романдық стратегиясын қолданамыз. Жебелерді таңдау жасалған контексттерге бос бағытты мәліметті қосу. Біз деректер қорларының көпшілік көпшілікті сипаттамасын береміз, және бірнеше стандартты классификациялау тәжірибелері келтірілген ресурстың санаттық сенімділігі Мысалы компоненттерді жинау үшін басқа тілдерге қолданылады, комплекс вербалар және басқа тілдерге айналысатын мақсаттары бар.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan koleksi untuk menilai komponen makna dalam verb kompleks Jerman, yang sering mengalami perubahan makna. We use a novel strategy to obtain source and target domain characterisations via sentence generation rather than sentence annotation.  Pemilihan panah menambah maklumat arah ruang ke konteks yang dijana. Kami menyediakan keterangan kualitatif luas bagi set data, dan satu siri eksperimen klasifikasi piawai mengesahkan kepercayaan kuantitatif sumber yang ditetapkan. The setup for collecting the meaning components is applicable also to other languages, regarding complex verbs as well as other language-specific targets that involve meaning shifts.', 'ml': 'ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d കുഴപ്പമുള്ള വാര്\u200dപ്പുകളില്\u200d ഉള്ള ഘടകങ്ങളെ പരിഗണിക്കാന്\u200d ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ഒരു സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത വാക്ക് തലമുറയില്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം വാക്ക് തലമുറയില്\u200d നിന്നും സോര്\u200dസ്സും ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d സ്വഭാവങ്ങളും ക സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റിയല്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സ്പെയില്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ച നമ്മള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിന്റെ വിശദീകരണം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ ക്ലാസ്റ്റഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. വിഭവങ് അര്\u200dത്ഥം കൂട്ടുന്നതിനുള്ള സാധനങ്ങള്\u200d മറ്റു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നുണ്ട്, ചിലപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളെക്കുറിച്ചും മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta ġbir biex jivvaluta l-komponenti tat-tifsira fil-verbi kumplessi Ġermaniżi, li spiss jgħaddu minn bidliet tat-tifsira. Aħna nużaw strateġija ġdida biex inkisbu karatterizzazzjonijiet tas-sors u tad-dominju fil-mira permezz tal-ġenerazzjoni tas-sentenzi minflok l-annotazzjoni tas-sentenzi. Għażla ta’ vleġġa żżid informazzjoni ġeografika direzzjonali mal-kuntesti ġġenerati. Aħna nipprovdu deskrizzjoni kwalitattiva wiesgħa tas-sett tad-dejta, u serje ta’ esperimenti ta’ klassifikazzjoni standard tivverifika l-affidabbiltà kwantitattiva tar-riżorsa ppreżentata. L-istruttura għall-ġbir tal-komponenti tat-tifsira hija applikabbli wkoll għal lingwi oħra, fir-rigward ta’ verbi kumplessi kif ukoll miri oħra speċifiċi għall-lingwi li jinvolvu bidliet fit-tifsira.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Германы комплекс хэллэгүүдийн утгыг үнэлэх хэмжээсүүдийг цуглуулдаг. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн утгыг өөрчлөх гэсэн үг. Бид шинэ стратегийг ашиглаж өгүүлбэрийн анзаарлын оронд эх үүсвэр болон зорилготой зорилготой дүрсийг өгүүлбэрээс илүү шаардлагатай. Сангуудын сонголт нь бий болсон орчинд орон зай багын мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлнэ. Бид өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн шинжлэх ухааны тодорхойлолтыг өгдөг. Стандарт хэлбэрийн туршилтууд танилцуулагдсан баялагийн хэмжээний итгэлтэй байдлыг шалгаж байна. Ийм утгатай компонентийг цуглуулахын тулд өөр хэл дээр ч мөн адилхан болдог.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono zbiór oceny składników znaczeniowych w niemieckich czasownikach złożonych, które często ulegają zmianom znaczeniowym. Używamy nowej strategii, aby uzyskać charakterystykę domen źródłowych i docelowych poprzez generowanie zdań, a nie adnotację zdań. Wybór strzałek dodaje informacje kierunkowe przestrzenne do generowanych kontekstów. Zapewniamy szeroki opis jakościowy zbioru danych, a seria standardowych eksperymentów klasyfikacyjnych weryfikuje wiarygodność ilościową prezentowanego zasobu. Konfiguracja gromadzenia składników znaczeniowych ma zastosowanie również do innych języków, dotyczących czasowników złożonych, jak również innych celów specyficznych dla języka, które wiążą się ze zmianami znaczenia.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o colecție de evaluare a componentelor semnificative ale verbelor complexe germane, care suferă frecvent schimbări de semnificație. Folosim o strategie nouă pentru a obține caracterizarea domeniului sursă și țintă prin generarea de propoziții, mai degrabă decât adnotare de propoziții. O selecție de săgeți adaugă informații direcționale spațiale contextelor generate. Oferim o descriere calitativă largă a setului de date, iar o serie de experimente standard de clasificare verifică fiabilitatea cantitativă a resursei prezentate. Setarea pentru colectarea componentelor de semnificație este aplicabilă și altor limbi, în ceea ce privește verbele complexe, precum și alte ținte specifice limbajului care implică schimbări de semnificație.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit samling for å vurdere meningskomponentar i tyske komplekse verbar, som ofte undergår forskyving. Vi brukar ein roman strategi for å få kjelde- og mål- domenekarakteriseringar via setningstillingar i staden for setningstillingar. Eit val av pil legg til mellomromrett informasjon til den genererte kontekstane. Vi gjev ein bred kvalitativ skildring av datasettet, og ein serie standardklassifikasjonsperimentar sjekkar kvantitetlighet på den presenterte ressursen. Oppsettet for å samla meningskomponentane er også tilgjengeleg for andre språk, om komplekse verbar og andre språksspesifikke mål som involverer forskyvingar.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුරේ සංගීතයක් පෙන්වනවා ජර්මාන් සංකේතයේ අදහස් අංකය අංකය කරන්න ජර්මාන් සංකේතයේ අංක අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් සහ ඉලක්කම් ඩොමේන් වලට ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ලැබෙන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් විද Name අපි දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ විශාල විස්තර විස්තර ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තර කරනවා, සහ ප්\u200dරමාණ විස්තර පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dර අදහස් භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධ කරගන්න සැකසුම් අනිත් භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න පුළුවන්, සම්බන්ධ භාෂාව සහ අනි', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja kolekciju za procjenu značajnih komponenta u njemačkim kompleksnim verbima, koje često poduzimaju smjene. Koristimo novu strategiju da bi dobili karakteristike izvora i ciljnih domena putem generacije rečenica umjesto annotacije rečenica. Izaber strela dodaje prostorne direktivne informacije u proizvedene kontekste. Mi pružamo širok kvalitativni opis seta podataka, i serija standardnih klasifikacijskih eksperimenata provjerava kvantitativnu pouzdanost predstavljenog resursa. Ustav za skupljanje značajnih komponenata takođe je primjenjivan i na druge jezike, u pogledu kompleksnih verba, kao i drugih ciljeva specifičnih jezika koji uključuju smjene značenja.', 'so': 'This paper presents a collection to assess meaning components in German complex verbs, which frequently undergo meaning shifts.  Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qoraal warqad ah si aan u helno suurad iyo waxyaabaha deegaanka loogu talagalay tusaale ahaan farshaxanka garsooridda. Dalbasha fallaadha waxaa lagu daraa macluumaad hagitaan oo ku saabsan warqadaha la soo dhashay. Waxaannu sameynaa sawir ballaadhan oo ku saabsan sawirada, imtixaan kala duduwan oo kala duduwanna waxay xaqiijiyaan aaminnimada nolosha la soo saaray. Heshiiska la soo ururiyo qeybaha maanka ah waxaa sidoo kale lagu habboon karaa luuqado kale, kuwaas oo ku saabsan hadallada adag iyo waxyaabaha kale oo la jeedo isbedelka looga jeedo luuqadaha kale.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en samling för att bedöma betydelsekomponenter i tyska komplexa verb, som ofta genomgår meningsskiften. Vi använder en ny strategi för att få käll- och måldomänkarakteriseringar via meningsgenerering snarare än meningsanatering. Ett urval pilar lägger till rumslig riktningsinformation i de genererade sammanhangen. Vi ger en bred kvalitativ beskrivning av datauppsättningen och en serie standardklassificeringsexperiment verifierar den kvantitativa tillförlitligheten hos den presenterade resursen. Inställningen för att samla in meningskomponenterna är tillämplig även på andra språk, när det gäller komplexa verb samt andra språkspecifika mål som involverar meningsskiften.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் அர்த்தமான பொருள்களை மதிப்பிடுவதற்கு ஒரு தொகுப்பை அளிக்கிறது, அதாவது அர்த்தமான மாற்றங்களை வழங்கும். வாக்கு அறிவிப்பு பதிலாக நாம் மூலம் மற்றும் களத்தின் எழுத்துக்களை கொண்டு வாக்கியம் தலைமுறையை பெறுவதற்கான ப ஒரு அம்புகளின் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட முனைய தகவலுக்கு இடைவெளி திசையை சேர்க்கிறது. நாம் தரவு அமைப்பின் விவரங்களை விரிவாக்குகிறோம், மற்றும் நிலையான வகுப்பு பரிசோதனைகள் கொண்ட மூலத்தின் அளவு நம்பிக்கையை உறுதி செ இதர பொருள்களை சேகரிக்கும் அமைப்பு மற்ற மொழிகளுக்கும் பயன்படுத்தப்படும், சிக்கலான செயல்களையும் மற்றொரு மொழிக்குறிப்பிட்ட குறி', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک مجموعہ پیش کرتا ہے جو جرمن کی پیچیدہ کلیزوں میں معنی رقموں کی آزمائش کرتا ہے، جو بہت سے دفعہ تغییر کے مطلب ہیں. ہم ایک نئی استراتژی استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ سورج اور موقع ڈومین کی تعریفیں حاصل کرنے کے لئے مجلس کی نسل کے ذریعہ بغیر مجلس کا اظہار کریں۔ تیروں کا انتخاب جگہ دکھانے والی معلومات پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں ہم ڈاٹ سٹ کے گھیرے کیلوٹیٹیوں کا سفارش دیتے ہیں، اور استاندارڈ کلاسیفوں کی آزمائش کی سفارش کرتی ہے کہ وہاں پیش کیے ہوئے رسسور کے مقدار اعتمادی قابلیت کی تصدیق کرتی ہے. مطلب رغبتوں کو جمع کرنے کے لئے سٹاپ بھی دوسری زبانوں کے لئے بھی لازم ہے، پیچیدہ ویروں کے بارے میں اور دوسری زبان خاص نشانیوں کے بارے میں جو مطلب تغییرات کے ساتھ شامل ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz, Olmoncha kompyuterdagi komponentlarni qiymatish uchun bir to ʻplamni koʻrsatadi. Bu ko'pincha o'zgarishlarni ko'paytirish mumkin. Biz soʻzning taqdimotini oʻzgartirish orqali soʻzning taqdimotini olish uchun novel strategiya foydalanamiz. Name Biz maʼlumot bazasining kengaytmalarini ko'p taʼrifi qilamiz. Koʻrsatilgan manbaning qiymatiga katta ishlatiladi. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này có một bộ sưu tập để đánh giá các thành phần của các động từ phức tạp Đức, thường xuyên thay đổi. Chúng tôi sử dụng một chiến lược mới để đạt được đặc trưng về lãnh thổ bằng câu án thay vì ghi chú. Một loạt các mũi tên thêm các thông tin về hướng không gian vào các ngữ cảnh đã tạo ra. Chúng tôi cung cấp một mô tả chất lượng rộng rãi về bộ dữ liệu, và một loạt các thí nghiệm tiêu chuẩn xác nhận độ tin cậy về chất lượng. Thiết lập để thu thập các thành phần nghĩa cũng được áp dụng cho các ngôn ngữ khác, liên quan đến các động từ phức tạp, cũng như các mục tiêu ngôn ngữ khác, gồm có nghĩa thay đổi.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en samling til vurdering af betydningskomponenter i tyske komplekse udsagnsord, som ofte gennemgår betydningsforskydninger. Vi bruger en ny strategi til at opnå kilde- og måldomænekarakteriseringer via sætningsgenerering frem for sætningsadmærkning. Et udvalg af pile tilføjer geografisk retningsbestemt information til de genererede sammenhænge. Vi giver en bred kvalitativ beskrivelse af datasættet, og en række standardklassifikationseksperimenter verificerer den kvantitative pålidelighed af den præsenterede ressource. Opsætningen til at indsamle betydningskomponenterne gælder også for andre sprog, hvad angår komplekse verber samt andre sprogspecifikke mål, der involverer betydningsforskydninger.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een verzameling van betekeniscomponenten in Duitse complexe werkwoorden, die vaak betekenisverschuivingen ondergaan. We gebruiken een nieuwe strategie om karakteriseringen van bron- en doeldomein te verkrijgen via zinnengeneratie in plaats van zinnenanotatie. Een selectie van pijlen voegt ruimtelijke richtingsinformatie toe aan de gegenereerde contexten. We bieden een brede kwalitatieve beschrijving van de dataset, en een reeks standaard classificatieexperimenten verifieert de kwantitatieve betrouwbaarheid van de gepresenteerde bron. De opstelling voor het verzamelen van de betekeniscomponenten is ook van toepassing op andere talen, met betrekking tot complexe werkwoorden en andere taalspecifieke doelen die betekenisverschuivingen impliceren.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja kolekciju za procjenu značajnih komponenata u njemačkim kompleksnim verbima, koje često poduzimaju smjene. Koristimo novu strategiju za dobivanje karakteristika izvora i ciljnih domena putem generacije rečenica umjesto annotacije rečenica. Izaber strela dodaje prostorne direktivne informacije u proizvedene kontekste. Mi pružamo širok kvalitativni opis seta podataka, i niz standardnih klasifikacijskih eksperimenata provjerava kvantitativnu pouzdanost predstavljenog resursa. Ustav za skupljanje značajnih komponenata primjenjuje se također na drugi jezici, u pogledu kompleksnih verba, kao i drugih ciljeva specifičnih jezika koji uključuju smjene značenja.', 'bg': 'Статията представя колекция за оценка на компонентите на значението в немските сложни глаголи, които често претърпяват промени на значението. Използваме нова стратегия за получаване на характеристики на източника и целевия домейн чрез генериране на изречения, а не анотация на изречения. Избор от стрелки добавя пространствена насочена информация към генерираните контексти. Предоставяме широко качествено описание на набора от данни, а серия от стандартни класификационни експерименти проверява количествената надеждност на представения ресурс. Настройката за събиране на компонентите на значението е приложима и за други езици, по отношение на сложните глаголи, както и други специфични за езика цели, които включват промени на значението.', 'ko': '본고는 독일어의 복잡한 동사 중의 의미 성분을 평가하는 집합을 소개했는데 이런 동사는 의미 이동이 자주 발생한다.우리는 문장 주석이 아닌 문장 생성을 통해 원역과 목표역의 특징을 얻는 새로운 전략을 사용한다.화살표의 선택은 생성된 상하문에 공간 방향 정보를 추가합니다.우리는 데이터 집합에 대해 광범위한 정성 설명을 하고 일련의 표준 분류 실험을 통해 제공된 자원의 정량 신뢰성을 검증했다.의미 성분을 수집하는 설정도 다른 언어, 복잡한 동사 및 의미 이동과 관련된 특정한 언어 목표에 적용된다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan koleksi untuk menilai komponen arti dalam verb rumit Jerman, yang sering mengalami perubahan arti. Kami menggunakan strategi baru untuk mendapatkan karakterisasi sumber dan domain target melalui generasi kalimat daripada anotasi kalimat. Sebuah seleksi panah menambah informasi ruang arah ke konteks yang dihasilkan. Kami menyediakan deskripsi kualitatif luas dari set data, dan seri eksperimen klasifikasi standar mengkonfirmasi kepercayaan kuantitatif sumber daya yang ditemukan. Pengaturan untuk mengumpulkan komponen arti juga berlaku pada bahasa lain, mengenai verb kompleks dan target spesifik bahasa lainnya yang melibatkan perubahan arti.', 'de': 'Die vorliegende Arbeit stellt eine Sammlung zur Bewertung von Bedeutungskomponenten in deutschen komplexen Verben vor, die häufig Bedeutungsverschiebungen durchlaufen. Wir verwenden eine neuartige Strategie, um Quell- und Zieldomänencharakterisationen über Satzgeneration anstatt Satzanannotation zu erhalten. Eine Auswahl von Pfeilen fügt den generierten Kontexten räumliche Richtungsinformationen hinzu. Wir liefern eine breite qualitative Beschreibung des Datensatzes und eine Reihe von Standardklassifizierungsexperimenten verifiziert die quantitative Zuverlässigkeit der vorgestellten Ressource. Der Aufbau zum Sammeln der Bedeutungskomponenten ist auch auf andere Sprachen anwendbar, sowohl hinsichtlich komplexer Verben als auch anderer sprachspezifischer Ziele, die Bedeutungsverschiebungen beinhalten.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مجموعه را برای ارزیابی معنی\u200cها در کلمات پیچیده آلمانی نشان می\u200cدهد که اغلب به معنی تغییرات می\u200cرسد. ما از استراتژی نو استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا ویژه\u200cهای منبع و هدف را از طریق نسل جمله به جای اظهار جمله بگیریم. انتخاب برچسب\u200cها اطلاعات راهنمایی فضایی را به موقعیتهای تولید می\u200cکند. ما یک توصیف کیفیت گسترده از مجموعه داده\u200cها را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، و یک مجموعه آزمایش\u200cهای مختصات استاندارد اعتماد مقداری منابع پیشنهاد را ثابت می\u200cکند. تنظیم برای جمع کردن بخش\u200cهای معنی برای زبان\u200cهای دیگر، در مورد کلمات پیچیده و هدف\u200cهای مخصوص زبان\u200cهای دیگر که شامل تغییرات معنی است، موجود می\u200cشود.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz nemesçe karmaşık wersiýalarda näme milletleri diýjek hasaplamak üçin bir ýygnak getirilýär. Biz çeşme we maksady domena karakterlerini sözlem döredilmesi ýerine çeşme strategiýasyny ulanýarys. Guşlaryň saýlawy gabdaly metini janlaşdyrylýan contextlere ekleýär Biz veri setiriniň döwletleri meýilleşdirýän waspyny saýlaýrys we standart klasifikasyon deneyleriniň birnäçe çeşitli hasaplanyşyny barlaýar. Maksadyň komponentleri toplamak üçin başga dillere hem tapanýar, çylşyrlyk verbeler we dilleriň beýleki maksadlary bilen meýilleşdirýär.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta mkusanyiko wa kutathmini vipengele vya maana katika maneno magumu ya Ujerumani, ambavyo mara nyingi huendesha mabadiliko yanayomaanisha. Tunatumia mkakati wa riwaya ili kupata chanzo na lengo la kuweka alama za ndani kwa kupitia kizazi cha hukumu badala ya kutangaza hukumu. Uchaguzi wa mabwawa unaongeza taarifa za maendeleo ya moja kwa moja katika matatizo yaliyotengenezwa. Tunatoa maelezo mengi ya taarifa hiyo, na mfululizo wa majaribio ya usawa wa kawaida yanathibitisha uaminifu wa rasilimali zilizotolewa. The setup for collecting the meaning components is applicable also to other languages, regarding complex verbs as well as other language-specific targets that involve meaning shifts.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n versameling voorsien om betekening komponente in Duitse komplekse verbe te assesseer, wat dikwels ondersteun betekening verskuif. Ons gebruik 'n nuwe strategie om bron en doel domein karakteriserings te kry deur setgenerasie in plaas as sin annotasie. Name Ons verskaf 'n breë kwaliteit beskrywing van die datastel, en 'n reeks van standaard klasifikasie eksperimente bevestig die kvantitatiewe vertroulikheid van die voorgestelde hulpbron. Die opstelling vir die versameling van die betekenis komponente is ook toewenbaar aan ander tale, aangesien komplekse verbe en ander taal-spesifieke doels wat betekenis verskuiwes insluit.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የግንኙነቱን የጀርመን አካባቢ ቃላት ለማስተዋል ጉዳይ ያቀርባል፡፡ We use a novel strategy to obtain source and target domain characterisations via sentence generation rather than sentence annotation.  የተመረጠው ፍላጻ ምረጡ በተፈጠረ ጥቅሎች ላይ የስፋዊ ገዳይ መረጃ ይጨምርበታል። የዳታ ማህበረሰብ ስፋት እናሳውቃለን፣ የአሁኑንም ክፍል የሚያስፈልገውን የሚታመን ክፍል እናረጋግጣለን፡፡ በተጨማሪው ቃላት እና በተጨማሪው የቋንቋ አካላት ለመሰብሰብ የተጠቃሚ ጉዳይ ለሌሎች ቋንቋዎች ደግሞ የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Kjo letër paraqet një koleksion për të vlerësuar komponentet e kuptimit në verbet komplekse gjermane, të cilat shpesh kalojnë ndryshime të kuptimit. Ne përdorim një strategji të re për të marrë karakterizatat e burimit dhe të domenit objektiv nëpërmjet gjenerimit të fjalëve në vend të anotacionit të fjalëve. Një zgjedhje shigjeta shton informacion drejtues hapësiror në kontekstet e gjeneruar. Ne ofrojmë një përshkrim të gjerë kualitativ të të dhënave, dhe një seri eksperimentesh klasifikimi standard verifikon besueshmërinë kuantitative të burimit të paraqitur. Rregullimi për mbledhjen e komponenteve të kuptimit është i aplikueshëm gjithashtu për gjuhët e tjera, lidhur me verbe komplekse si dhe objektiva të tjera specifike gjuhës që përfshijnë ndryshime të kuptimit.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է մի հավաքածու, որպեսզի գնահատի գերմանացի բարդ բայերի իմաստային բայերը, որոնք հաճախ փոխվում են իմաստային փոփոխություններով: Մենք օգտագործում ենք նոր ռազմավարություն, որպեսզի ստանանք աղբյուրի և նպատակային բնագավառի բնորոշներ նախադասությունների ստեղծման միջոցով, ոչ թե նախադասությունների նոտացիայի միջոցով: Սլաքների ընտրությունը ավելացնում է տարածական ուղղություն տեղեկատվություն ստեղծված կոնտեքստներին: Մենք տրամադրում ենք տվյալների համակարգի լայն որակային նկարագրություն, և մի շարք ստանդարտ դասակարգման փորձեր ստուգում են ներկայացված ռեսուրսների քանակական վստահությունը: Այսինքն, իմաստային բաղադրիչների հավաքածու կառուցվածքը կիրառվում է նաև այլ լեզուների համար՝ բարդ բայերի, ինչպես նաև այլ լեզվի մասնավոր նպատակների հետ, որոնք ներառում են իմաստային փոփոխություններ:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt Alman kompleks verblərində anlamlı komponentləri təsdiqləmək üçün bir koleksiyon göstərir. Bu çox sık dəyişikliklərin anlamına gəlir. Biz cümlələr təşkil etmək yerinə mənbə və məqsəd domeinin əlamətlərini almaq üçün yeni bir strateji istifadə edirik. Oqlar seçilməsi yaratdığı müxtəliflərə uzay yönəlmiş məlumatları ekləyir. Biz verilən qurğunun geniş kvalitativ tərzini təsdiqləyirik və standart klasifikasiya təcrübələrinin bir serisini təsdiqləyici çoxluğunu təsdiqləyirik. Məsələn komponentləri toplamaq üçün müəyyən edilən quruluş, kompleks verblər və başqa dillərin müəyyən edilməsi barədə də başqa dillərə uyğunlaşdırılır.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি জার্মানের জটিল কমপ্লেক্স ভার্সগুলোর মানে একটি সংগ্রহের উপস্থাপন করে, যার মানে প্রায়শই পরিবর্তন করে। সোর্স এবং ডোমেইনের চরিত্রের জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস কৌশল ব্যবহার করি শাস্তি প্রজন্মের পরিবর্তে শাস্তি প্রজন্মের মা একটি তীর নির্বাচনের মধ্যে স্পেশিয়াল সরাসরি তথ্য যোগ করে তৈরি করা যায়। আমরা ডাটাসেটের ব্যাপারে বিস্তারিত ব্যাখ্যা দিয়েছি এবং কিছু স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার ব্লাস্ফিকেশন পরীক্ষা প্রদান করা হয়েছে যে সম্পদ অন্যান্য ভাষার মানে অর্থ সংগ্রহের জন্য বৈশিষ্ট্য, জটিল ভাষায় এবং অন্যান্য ভাষার মানে পরিবর্তনের মানে বিশেষ লক্ষ্যের বিষয়ে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja kolekciju za procjenu značajnih komponenta u njemačkim kompleksnim verbima, koje često poduzimaju smjene. Koristimo novu strategiju da bi dobili karakteristike izvora i ciljanja domena putem generacije rečenica umjesto annotacije kazne. Izaber strela dodaje prostorne direktivne informacije u proizvedene kontekste. Mi pružamo širok kvalitativni opis seta podataka, i serija standardnih klasifikacijskih eksperimenata potvrđuje kvantitativnu pouzdanost predstavljenog resursa. Ustav za skupljanje značajnih komponenata također je primjenjivan i na drugi jezici, u vezi kompleksnih verba, kao i drugih ciljeva specifičnih jezika koji uključuju smjene značenja.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta una col·lecció per avaluar components significatius en verbs complexes alemanys, que sovint passan canvis significatius. Utilitzem una nova estratègia per aconseguir caracteritzacions de domini de fonts i destinataris a través de la generació de frases en comptes d'anotació de frases. Una selecció de fletxes afegeix informació de direcció espacial als contextes generats. We provide a broad qualitative description of the dataset, and a series of standard classification experiments verifies the quantitative reliability of the presented resource.  La configuració per recollir els components significatius també s'aplica a altres llengües, en relació amb verbs complexes i altres objectius específics per llengües que impliquen canvis de significat.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje sbírku pro hodnocení významových složek v německých slovesích komplexních, která často procházejí významovými posuny. Používáme novou strategii k získání charakterizace zdrojové a cílové domény prostřednictvím generování vět spíše než anotace vět. Výběr šipek přidává prostorové směrové informace do generovaných kontextů. Poskytujeme široký kvalitativní popis datové sady a řadu standardních klasifikačních experimentů ověřuje kvantitativní spolehlivost prezentovaného zdroje. Nastavení pro shromažďování významových složek je použitelné i pro jiné jazyky, pokud jde o složitá slovesa a další jazykově specifické cíle, které zahrnují posun významu.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittelee kokoelman, jolla arvioidaan saksankielisten monimutkaisten verbien merkityskomponentteja, joiden merkitys muuttuu usein. Käytämme uudenlaista strategiaa lähteen ja kohdeverkkotunnuksen karakterisointien hankkimiseen lauseiden tuottamisen sijaan lauseen annotoinnin avulla. Nuolivalikoima lisää luotuihin konteksteihin paikkatietosuuntatietoa. Tarjoamme laajan laadullisen kuvauksen aineistosta, ja standardiluokituskokeiden sarja todentaa aineiston kvantitatiivisen luotettavuuden. Merkityskomponenttien keräämisen asetukset soveltuvat myös muille kielille, niin monimutkaisten verbien kuin muiden merkityskohtaisten kohteiden osalta.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis esitatakse kogumik saksa keerukate tegusõnade tähenduskomponentide hindamiseks, mis sageli läbivad tähendusenihkeid. Me kasutame uut strateegiat, et saada lähte- ja sihtdomeeni iseloomustusi lause genereerimise, mitte lause annoteerimise kaudu. Noolte valik lisab loodud kontekstidele ruumilist suunateavet. Pakume andmekogumi laia kvalitatiivse kirjelduse ning standardsete klassifikatsioonikatsete seeria tõendab esitatud ressursi kvantitatiivset usaldusväärsust. Tähenduskomponentide kogumise seadistus kehtib ka teistele keeltele, nii keerukate tegusõnade kui ka teiste keelespetsiifiliste sihtmärkide puhul, mis hõlmavad tähenduse nihkeid.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג אוסף כדי להעריך רכיבים משמעותיים בארבים מורכבים גרמניים, שעובדים לעתים קרובות משתנות משמעותיות. אנחנו משתמשים באסטרטגיה חדשה כדי להשיג תאריך מקור ומטרה בתחום דרך דורת משפטים במקום ציון משפטים. A selection of arrows adds spatial directional information to the generated contexts.  אנחנו מספקים תיאור איכותי רחב של קבוצת המידע, וסדרה של ניסויים מסווגים סטנדרטיים מאשרים את אמינות המידתית של המשאב המוציא. המערכת לאספת רכיבי המשמעות מתאימה גם לשפות אחרות, בנוגע לחברים מורכבים כמו גם מטרות ספציפיות לשפות אחרות שכוללות שינויים משמעותיים.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena zbirka za ocenjevanje pomenskih komponent v nemških kompleksnih glagolih, ki se pogosto spreminjajo pomen. Uporabljamo novo strategijo za pridobivanje karakterizacij izvorne in ciljne domene prek ustvarjanja stavkov in ne pripomb stavkov. Izbor puščic doda prostorske smernice ustvarjenim kontekstom. Zagotavljamo širok kvalitativni opis nabora podatkov, serija standardnih klasifikacijskih eksperimentov pa preverja kvantitativno zanesljivost predstavljenega vira. Nastavitev zbiranja pomenskih komponent velja tudi za druge jezike, kar zadeva kompleksne glagole in druge jezikovno specifične cilje, ki vključujejo spremembe pomena.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da wani jujjari dõmin ka ƙayyade composhi cikin zanen jerumani, wanda ke tafiyar da muhimmin musamman. Tuna amfani da wani kimar node don mu sami tsarin kwanan da za'a yi amfani da shi don ka sami zartar da haske cikin kwanan kwanan kwanan da za'a yi amfani da shi @ action: inmenu Munã bãyar da rabo mai ƙunci na tsarin database, kuma masu ƙidãya masu jarrabãwa na daban-daban na daidaita, yana gaskata tsakanin aminci na ci na da ake haɗa. Tsarin da za'a haɗi compound ɗin da ake amfani da shi zuwa harshen wasu, masu husu'ar verbs masu husũma da wasu na'ura da masu amfani da musamman musamman cikin lugha.", 'bo': 'ཤོག ང་ཚོས་ཚིག arrows ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་གནད་སྡུད་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་གྲངས་རིམ་ཀྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་པར་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་གཞན་དང་གཅིག་པུ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།', 'jv': 'Awak-Ngerawat iki nggo ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno apakno ning sembaran kelangan karo verb sing kelangan, sing dino sing nyimpen We use a new policy to find source and Tarih domain character string" in "context_BAR_stringLink string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Setup kanggo nggawe bahsa kompon sing dikarepon sing nggawe tindang wis dipun, meraké verb sing kompon lan ujaran oleh nggawe aturan kap tanggal sing wis dipun nggawe'}
{'en': 'Mixing Context Granularities for Improved Entity Linking on Question Answering Data across Entity Categories', 'ar': 'خلط دقة السياق لتحسين ربط الكيان عند الإجابة عن الأسئلة عبر فئات الكيانات', 'fr': 'Mélange de granularités de contexte pour améliorer la liaison des entités sur les données de réponse aux questions dans toutes les catégories', 'es': 'Mezcla de granularidades de contexto para mejorar la vinculación de entidades en los datos de respuesta a preguntas en todas', 'pt': 'Misturando granularidades de contexto para vinculação de entidade aprimorada em dados de resposta a perguntas entre categorias de entidade', 'ja': 'エンティティカテゴリ全体のデータに回答する質問に対するエンティティリンクの改善のためのコンテキスト粒度の混合', 'zh': '混合上下文粒度,以改进跨实之类链接', 'hi': 'निकाय श्रेणियों में प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाले डेटा पर लिंकिंग बेहतर एंटिटी के लिए संदर्भ ग्रैन्युलैरिटीज़ मिश्रण करना', 'ru': 'Смешивание гранулярности контекста для улучшенной связи сущностей по данным ответов на вопросы по категориям сущностей', 'ga': 'Meascadh Comhthéacs Granularities le haghaidh Aonán Feabhsaithe Nascáil ar Shonraí Freagra Ceist thar Chatagóirí Aonáin', 'el': 'Μείξη κοκκοποιητικών πλαισίων για βελτιωμένη σύνδεση οντοτήτων σε ερωτήματα Απάντηση δεδομένων σε όλες τις κατηγορίες οντοτήτων', 'hu': 'A kontextusgranularitások keverése a kérdésekre vonatkozó adatok jobb összekapcsolásához az entitáskategóriák között', 'ka': 'კონტექსტის გრანულაციების შესაბამისი ინტერნეტის შესაბამისი კონტექსტის შესაბამისი კონტექსტის შესაბამისი ინტერნეტის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი', 'lt': 'Įgyvendinant geresnio subjekto ryšio su atsakymų į klausimus duomenimis pagal subjektų kategorijas konteksto granuliarumo mišinys', 'it': 'Miscelare granularità del contesto per migliorare il collegamento delle entità sui dati di risposta alle domande tra le categorie di entità', 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауап беру деректерінің санаттары бойынша жақсартылған нысандарды жасау контексттің грануляриялары', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയ എന്റിറ്റിയുടെ ലിങ്ങിങ്ങിനുള്ള ഉത്തരം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മറുപടി വിഭാഗത്തിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Il-Granularitajiet tal-Kuntest għat-Tajba tar-Rabta bejn Entitajiet dwar id-Dejta tat-Tweġiba għall-Mistoqsijiet bejn il-Kategoriji tal-Entitajiet', 'mn': 'Объектын хэлбэрээр хариулах өгөгдлийн хувьд сайжруулагдсан бүтэц холбоотой төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөө', 'ms': 'Mixing Context Granularities for Improved Entity Linking on Question Answering Data across Entity Categories', 'no': 'Minsk kontekstgrensesnitt for forbetra einingslenking på spørsmål svarande data over einingskategoriar', 'ro': 'Amestecarea granularităților contextului pentru îmbunătățirea legăturii entităților în datele de răspuns la întrebări între categoriile de entități', 'pl': 'Mieszanie granularności kontekstu dla ulepszonego łączenia podmiotów na pytania Dane odpowiadające na pytania w różnych kategoriach podmiotów', 'so': 'Isku xiriirka xiriirka ganacsiga ee ku saabsan jawaabta macluumaadka ku saabsan qeybaha ganacsiga', 'sr': 'Mešanje kontekstskih granularitija za poboljšane povezanje podataka o odgovoru na pitanja u kategoriji podataka', 'sv': 'Blanda kontextgranulariteter för förbättrad enhetskoppling vid frågesvarsdata mellan entitetskategorier', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විතරයි.', 'ta': 'மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட உள்ளீட்டு இணைப்புக்கான மிகப்பெரிய சிறப்பு', 'ur': 'انٹیٹی کاٹیوں میں ڈاٹی جواب دینے پر سوال کے بارے میں بہترین انٹیٹی لینک کے لئے کنٹیکسٹ گرانولاریٹ میکس کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'trộn độ lớn liên kết các đơn vị cải thiện liên kết câu hỏi với các phân loại loài chi tiết.', 'nl': 'Contextgranulariteiten mengen voor verbeterde entiteitskoppeling op vragenbeantwoordingsgegevens in entiteitscategorieën', 'bg': 'Смесване на гранулярностите на контекста за подобрено свързване на субекти на данни за отговор на въпроси в категориите субекти', 'hr': 'Pomješavanje granulacija konteksta za poboljšane povezanje podataka o odgovoru na pitanja u kategoriji podataka', 'da': 'Blanding af kontekstgranulariteter for forbedret sammenkædning af enheder om spørgsmål besvarelsesdata på tværs af enhedskategorier', 'de': 'Mischen von Kontextgranularitäten für eine verbesserte Entitätsverknüpfung bei Fragen Beantwortung von Daten über Entitätskategorien hinweg', 'id': 'Mixing Context Granularities for Improved Entity Linking on Question Answering Data across Entity Categories', 'ko': '상하문 입도를 혼합하여 실체 클래스별 문답 데이터의 실체 링크를 개선하다', 'fa': 'ترکیب داده\u200cهای محیط برای ارتباط شرکت\u200cهای بهتر در مورد جواب داده\u200cهای سوال در مجموعه\u200cهای شرکت', 'sw': 'Kuchanganya Mitandao kwa ajili ya Kuunganisha Ujadala Kuboresha swali la Kujibu Taarifa katika Makegori ya Ujumbe', 'af': 'Menger Konteks Granularisies vir verbeterde Entiteit Skakel op Fraag Antwoord Data oor Entiteit Kategories', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'tr': 'Sorag Jogap Maglumaty Diňe Kalamlar üçin Maýyp Gowylan Entity Kalamlary', 'sq': 'Përzjerja e granulariteteve të kontekstit për lidhjen e përmirësuar të njësisë mbi të dhënat për përgjigjen e pyetjeve nëpërmjet kategorive të njësisë', 'hy': 'Հարցերի պատասխանների տվյալների բարելավված կառուցվածքի համատեքստի գրանիալիաների խառնումը կապված կառուցվածքների մեջ', 'bn': 'প্রশ্ন সম্পর্কে প্রশ্নের প্রশ্নের জন্য বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তুর গ্রানুলিটি মিক্সিং করা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'Ünvan Kategoriyaları arasında sual cavab vermək məlumatları üçün Improved Entity Linking üçün Kontext Granularitiləri karışır', 'ca': "Misturar granularitats de contest per millorar l'enllaç entre entitats en les dades de resposta a preguntes per categories d'entitats", 'bs': 'Pomješavanje granulacija konteksta za poboljšane povezanje podataka o odgovoru na pitanje podataka u kategoriji podataka', 'et': 'Üksuste kategooriate küsimustele vastavate andmete parema ühendamise konteksti granulaarsuse segamine', 'cs': 'Míchání granularit kontextu pro lepší propojení entit na odpovědi na otázky Data napříč kategoriemi entit', 'fi': 'Yhdistämällä kontekstin granulaarisuuksia parannettuun entiteettien linkittämiseen kysymyksiin vastaamisessa eri entiteettiluokkien välillä', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'מערבב סביבות קונטקסט עבור קישור ישות משפר על נתונים לענות על שאלות ברחבי קטגוריות ישויות', 'sk': 'Mešanje granularnosti konteksta za izboljšano povezovanje entitet na podatke o odgovoru na vprašanja v kategorijah entitet', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Improved Entity Linking on Question Answering Data across Entity Categories'}
{'en': 'The first stage of every knowledge base question answering approach is to link entities in the input question. We investigate entity linking in the context of question answering task and present a jointly optimized neural architecture for entity mention detection and entity disambiguation that models the surrounding context on different levels of granularity. We use the Wikidata knowledge base and available question answering datasets to create benchmarks for entity linking on question answering data. Our approach outperforms the previous state-of-the-art system on this data, resulting in an average 8 % improvement of the final score. We further demonstrate that our model delivers a strong performance across different entity categories.', 'ar': 'تتمثل المرحلة الأولى من كل نهج للإجابة على أسئلة قاعدة المعارف في ربط الكيانات في سؤال الإدخال. نحن نحقق في ربط الكيان في سياق مهمة الإجابة على السؤال ونقدم بنية عصبية مُحسّنة بشكل مشترك للكيان تذكر الكشف وتوضيح الكيان الذي يصمم السياق المحيط على مستويات مختلفة من التفاصيل. نحن نستخدم قاعدة المعرفة Wikidata ومجموعات البيانات المتوفرة للإجابة على الأسئلة لإنشاء معايير لربط الكيانات ببيانات الإجابة على الأسئلة. يتفوق نهجنا على أحدث النظم السابقة في هذه البيانات ، مما أدى إلى تحسن متوسط بنسبة 8٪ في النتيجة النهائية. نثبت كذلك أن نموذجنا يقدم أداءً قويًا عبر فئات الكيانات المختلفة.', 'es': 'La primera etapa de cada enfoque de respuesta a preguntas de la base de conocimientos es vincular las entidades en la pregunta de entrada. Investigamos la vinculación de entidades en el contexto de la tarea de respuesta a preguntas y presentamos una arquitectura neuronal optimizada conjuntamente para la detección de menciones de entidades y la desambiguación de entidades que modela el contexto circundante en diferentes niveles de granularidad. Utilizamos la base de conocimientos de Wikidata y los conjuntos de datos de respuestas a preguntas disponibles para crear puntos de referencia para la vinculación de entidades en los datos de respuestas Nuestro enfoque supera al sistema de última generación anterior en estos datos, lo que resulta en una mejora media del 8% en la puntuación final. Además, demostramos que nuestro modelo ofrece un sólido rendimiento en diferentes categorías de entidades.', 'pt': 'O primeiro estágio de cada abordagem de resposta a perguntas da base de conhecimento é vincular entidades na pergunta de entrada. Investigamos a vinculação de entidades no contexto da tarefa de resposta a perguntas e apresentamos uma arquitetura neural conjuntamente otimizada para detecção de menção de entidade e desambiguação de entidade que modela o contexto circundante em diferentes níveis de granularidade. Usamos a base de conhecimento Wikidata e os conjuntos de dados de respostas a perguntas disponíveis para criar referências para vinculação de entidades em dados de respostas a perguntas. Nossa abordagem supera o sistema de última geração anterior nesses dados, resultando em uma melhoria média de 8% na pontuação final. Demonstramos ainda que nosso modelo oferece um forte desempenho em diferentes categorias de entidades.', 'fr': "La première étape de chaque approche de réponse aux questions de la base de connaissances consiste à relier les entités dans la question d'entrée. Nous étudions la liaison d'entités dans le contexte de la tâche de réponse aux questions et présentons une architecture neuronale optimisée conjointement pour la détection des mentions d'entités et la désambiguïsation des entités qui modélise le contexte environnant à différents niveaux de granularité. Nous utilisons la base de connaissances Wikidata et les ensembles de données de réponses aux questions disponibles pour créer des points de référence pour les liens d'entités sur les données de réponse aux questions. Notre approche surpasse le système de pointe précédent sur ces données, ce qui se traduit par une amélioration moyenne de 8\xa0% du score final. Nous démontrons également que notre modèle offre de solides performances dans différentes catégories d'entités.", 'ja': 'すべてのナレッジベースの質問回答アプローチの最初の段階は、入力質問のエンティティをリンクすることです。質問応答タスクの文脈でエンティティリンクを調査し、異なる粒度レベルで周囲の文脈をモデル化するエンティティ言及検出およびエンティティの曖昧さ解消のための共同最適化されたニューラルアーキテクチャを提示します。ウィキデータナレッジベースと利用可能な質問回答データセットを使用して、質問回答データ上のエンティティリンクのベンチマークを作成します。当社のアプローチは、このデータで以前の最先端のシステムを上回り、最終スコアの平均8%の改善をもたらします。当社のモデルは、さまざまなエンティティカテゴリにわたって強力なパフォーマンスを提供することをさらに示しています。', 'ru': 'Первый этап подхода к ответам на каждый вопрос базы знаний заключается в увязке объектов во входном вопросе. Мы исследуем связывание сущностей в контексте задачи ответа на вопросы и представляем совместно оптимизированную нейронную архитектуру для обнаружения упоминания сущностей и дезагрегирования сущностей, которая моделирует окружающий контекст на различных уровнях детализации. Мы используем базу знаний Викидата и доступные наборы данных для ответов на вопросы, чтобы создать критерии для связывания данных для ответов на вопросы. Наш подход превосходит предыдущую современную систему по этим данным, что приводит к среднему улучшению итогового балла на 8%. Мы также демонстрируем, что наша модель обеспечивает высокую производительность в различных категориях организаций.', 'zh': '每知识库问答之法第一阶段链接输问之实也。 问答之上下文,究其体链接,建优化之检,消歧义之神经架构,架构异级粒度上下文建模之。 用维基数知识库与可问数集来创立实体链接问答之数。 臣等之法,优于前者先进系统,终得分均增8%。 吾益证之,形于异体之中表现出色。', 'hi': 'प्रत्येक नॉलेज बेस प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के दृष्टिकोण का पहला चरण इनपुट प्रश्न में संस्थाओं को लिंक करना है। हम प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाले कार्य के संदर्भ में जोड़ने वाली इकाई की जांच करते हैं और इकाई उल्लेख का पता लगाने और इकाई के लिए एक संयुक्त रूप से अनुकूलित तंत्रिका वास्तुकला पेश करते हैं जो ग्रैन्युलैरिटी के विभिन्न स्तरों पर आसपास के संदर्भ को मॉडल करता है। हम प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाले डेटा पर जोड़ने वाली इकाई के लिए बेंचमार्क बनाने के लिए विकिडाटा नॉलेज बेस और उपलब्ध प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाले डेटासेट का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण इस डेटा पर पिछले अत्याधुनिक प्रणाली को मात देता है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप अंतिम स्कोर में औसतन 8% सुधार होता है। हम आगे प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल विभिन्न इकाई श्रेणियों में एक मजबूत प्रदर्शन प्रदान करता है।', 'ga': 'Is í an chéad chéim de gach cur chuige freagartha ceiste bonn eolais ná aonáin a nascadh sa cheist ionchuir. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar nascadh aonáin i gcomhthéacs tasc freagartha ceisteanna agus cuirimid i láthair ailtireacht néarúil atá optamaithe i gcomhpháirt le haghaidh braite lua aonáin agus dí-athbhrí aonáin a mhúnlaíonn an comhthéacs mórthimpeall ar leibhéil éagsúla gráinneachta. Bainimid úsáid as bunachar eolais Wikidata agus na tacair sonraí freagartha ceisteanna atá ar fáil chun tagarmharcanna a chruthú le haghaidh aonáin a nascann sonraí freagartha ceisteanna. Tá feidhmíocht ár gcur chuige níos fearr ná an córas úrscothach roimhe seo ar na sonraí seo, rud a fhágann gur tháinig feabhas 8% ar an meán ar an scór deiridh. Léirímid freisin go seachadann ár múnla feidhmíocht láidir thar chatagóirí éagsúla aonáin.', 'hu': 'Minden tudásbázis kérdésre válaszoló megközelítés első szakasza a bemeneti kérdésben szereplő entitások összekapcsolása. Vizsgáljuk az entitások összekapcsolását a kérdésre válaszoló feladat kontextusában, és bemutatunk egy közösen optimalizált neurális architektúrát az entitások említésére és entitások egyértelműsítésére, amely modellezi a környező kontextust különböző granularitási szinteken. A Wikidata tudásbázisát és a rendelkezésre álló kérdésre álló adatkészleteket használjuk arra, hogy referenciaértékeket hozzunk létre a kérdésre álló adatokhoz kapcsolódó entitásokhoz. Megközelítésünk ezen adatok alapján felülmúlja a korábbi korszerű rendszert, ami átlagosan 8%-os javulást eredményez a végső pontszám. Bemutatjuk továbbá, hogy modellünk erős teljesítményt nyújt a különböző entitáskategóriákban.', 'el': 'Το πρώτο στάδιο κάθε προσέγγισης απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις βάσης γνώσης είναι η σύνδεση οντοτήτων στην ερώτηση εισόδου. Ερευνούμε τη σύνδεση οντοτήτων στο πλαίσιο της εργασίας απάντησης ερωτήσεων και παρουσιάζουμε μια από κοινού βελτιστοποιημένη νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική για την ανίχνευση αναφορών οντοτήτων και την αποσαφήνιση οντοτήτων που μοντελοποιεί το περιβάλλον πλαίσιο σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα κοκκοποίησης. Χρησιμοποιούμε τη βάση γνώσεων και τα διαθέσιμα σύνολα δεδομένων απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις για να δημιουργήσουμε δείκτες αναφοράς για τη σύνδεση οντότητας σε δεδομένα απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις. Η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά το προηγούμενο σύστημα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε αυτά τα δεδομένα, με αποτέλεσμα τη μέση 8% βελτίωση της τελικής βαθμολογίας. Αποδεικνύουμε περαιτέρω ότι το μοντέλο μας παρέχει ισχυρή απόδοση σε διαφορετικές κατηγορίες οντοτήτων.', 'ka': 'ყველა მეცნიერების ბაზი კითხვის პირველი ფაეზი გადასწორება არის ინტერტიების გადასწორება კითხვაში. ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ინტერტიკა, რომელიც კითხვის კონტექსტის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის კონტექსტში ერთადერთად ოპტიმიზებული ნეიროლური აქტიქტიქტურაციას, რომელიც განსხვავება და ინტერტის განსხვავება, რო ჩვენ ვიკიდეტაციის ცნობიერების ბაზა და მისამართლო კითხვა, საკითხვა მონაცემების შესაძლებლობისთვის შექმნა ბანქმერი, რომელიც კითხვის გასაგებით მონაცე ჩვენი პროგორმა ამ მონაცემების წინა სურათის სისტემის შესაძლებლობად გავაკეთება, რომელიც გავაკეთება საშუალოდ 8%-ის გაუკეთება. ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო ძალიან გამოყენება განსხვავებული ინტერტიკო კატეგორიაში.', 'it': "La prima fase di ogni approccio di risposta alle domande della base di conoscenza consiste nel collegare le entità nella domanda di input. Investighiamo il collegamento di entità nel contesto del compito di risposta alle domande e presentiamo un'architettura neurale ottimizzata congiuntamente per il rilevamento delle menzioni di entità e la disambiguazione di entità che modella il contesto circostante su diversi livelli di granularità. Usiamo la knowledge base di Wikidata e i set di dati disponibili per rispondere alle domande per creare parametri di riferimento per il collegamento di entità sui dati di risposta alle domande. Il nostro approccio supera il precedente sistema all'avanguardia su questi dati, con un miglioramento medio dell'8% del punteggio finale. Dimostriamo inoltre che il nostro modello offre prestazioni forti in diverse categorie di entità.", 'lt': 'Pirmasis kiekvienos žinių bazės klausimų atsakymo metodo etapas yra susieti subjektus į klausimą dėl įvedimo. Mes tiriame subjektą, susijusį su klausimų atsakymo užduotimi, ir pateikiame bendrai optimizuotą subjekto neurologinę architektūrą, kurioje minimas aptikimas ir subjekto neaiškumas, kurie modeliuoja aplinkinę aplinką įvairiais granuliarumo lygiais. Naudojame Wikidata žinių bazę ir turimus klausimų rinkinius atsakydami į duomenų rinkinius, kad sukurtume lyginamuosius taškus subjektams, susiejantiems klausimų atsakymo duomenis. Our approach outperforms the previous state-of-the-art system on this data, resulting in an average 8% improvement of the final score.  Be to, mes įrodome, kad mūsų modelis teikia didelius rezultatus įvairiose subjektų kategorijose.', 'mk': 'Првата фаза на секоја база на знаење на пристапот за одговор на прашањата е поврзувањето на ентитетите во прашањето за влез. Истражуваме ентитет кој се поврзува во контекст на задачата за одговор на прашања и претставуваме заеднички оптимизирана нервна архитектура за ентитетот споменува детекција и дејамбигуација на ентитетот кои го моделираат околниот контекст на различни нивоа на грануларност. Ние ја користиме базата на знаење на Wikidata и достапните прашања одговарајќи на датотеките за да создадеме референтни значки за ентитетот кој се поврзува со податоците за одговори на прашања. Our approach outperforms the previous state-of-the-art system on this data, resulting in an average 8% improvement of the final score.  Понатаму демонстрираме дека нашиот модел дава силна перформанса во различни категории на ентитети.', 'ms': 'Tahap pertama setiap soalan asas pengetahuan yang menjawab pendekatan adalah pautan entiti dalam soalan input. Kami menyelidiki entiti yang menghubungkan dalam konteks tugas jawapan soalan dan mempersembahkan arkitektur saraf yang sama-sama optimizasi untuk pengesan entiti disebut dan nyahambiguasi entiti yang model konteks sekeliling pada tahap-tahap granulariti yang berbeza. Kami menggunakan pangkalan pengetahuan Wikidata dan pertanyaan tersedia menjawab set data untuk mencipta tanda referensi bagi entiti yang menghubungkan pada data menjawab pertanyaan. Pendekatan kita melebihi sistem kemajuan terdahulu pada data ini, yang menghasilkan peningkatan rata-rata 8% pada skor akhir. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa model kami memberikan prestasi yang kuat di seluruh kategori entiti yang berbeza.', 'kk': 'Әрбір білім негізгі сұрақтардың жауап берудің бірінші этапы - кіріс сұрақтағы нысандарды сілтемелеу. Біз сұрақ жауап беретін тапсырманың контекстіне сілтейтін нысанды зерттеп, бағдарламаларды анықтау және нысандарды бөлек бағдарламалық түрлі гранулариялық деңгейінде орналасқан контексті үлгілейтін невралдық архитектурасын бірі Біз Wikidata мәлімет негізін және қол жеткізетін сұрақ баптауларына сұрақ жауап беретін деректер баптауларының баптауларын құру үшін қолданамыз. Біздің тәсіліміз бұл деректердің алдыңғы орындау жүйесіне жасайды, соңғы нәрселердің орташа 8% жасауын жасайды. Біз үлгіміздің басқа бағдарламалар санаттарында күшті әсер ететін деңгейіміз.', 'ml': 'എല്ലാ അറിവുകളുടെയും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെയും ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെയും ആദ്യത്തെ സ്റ്റേജ് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ചോദ്യത്തില്\u200d വസ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്ന ശാസ്ത്രം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത്രത്തിന്റെ നിലപാടിന വിക്കിഡാറ്റ അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d ഉപ ഈ വിവരങ്ങളിലെ മുമ്പുള്ള കലാകാര്യ സംസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനത്തെ സ്കോരിന്റ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീയ വിഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള പ്രകടനം നല്\u200dകുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-ewwel stadju ta’ kull approċċ ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet dwar il-bażi tal-għarfien huwa li jiġu konnessi l-entitajiet fil-mistoqsija tal-input. Aħna ninvestigaw entità li torbot fil-kuntest tal-kompitu ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet u nippreżentaw arkitettura newrali ottimizzata b’mod konġunt għall-entità ssemmi l-individwazzjoni u d-diżambigwazzjoni tal-entità li timmudella l-kuntest madwar fuq livelli differenti ta’ granularità. Aħna nużaw il-bażi tal-għarfien tal-Wikidata u s-settijiet tad-dejta disponibbli li jwieġbu għall-mistoqsijiet biex inħolqu punti ta’ riferiment għall-entità li torbot mad-dejta li twieġeb għall-mistoqsijiet. L-approċċ tagħna jaqbeż is-sistema l-aktar avvanzata preċedenti dwar din id-dejta, li tirriżulta f’titjib medju ta’ 8 % tal-punteġġ finali. Aħna qed nippruvaw ukoll li l-mudell tagħna jwassal għal prestazzjoni qawwija fil-kategoriji differenti tal-entitajiet.', 'no': 'Den første staden på kvar kjenningsbasespørsmålet som svarar på tilnærming er å lenke oppføringar i innspørsmålet. Vi undersøker eininga som koplar til spørsmålet som svarar på oppgåve og presenterer eit samtidig optimalisert neuralarkitektur for oppdaging av einingar og disambiguasjon av einingar som modeller omvendte kontekst på ulike nivå av granularitet. Vi bruker Wikidata- kunnskapsbasen og tilgjengelege spørsmål som svarar på datasett for å laga benchmarker for eininga som lenkjer på spørsmåldata. Tilnærminga vårt utfører tidlegare kunstsystemet på denne dataen, og fører til at det gjennomsnittlig 8% forbetringa av det siste poenget. Vi viser meir at modellen vårt leverer ein sterk utvikling i ulike kategoriar.', 'pl': 'Pierwszym etapem każdego podejścia do odpowiedzi na pytania bazy wiedzy jest połączenie podmiotów w pytaniu wejściowym. Badamy łączenie jednostek w kontekście zadania odpowiadania na pytania i przedstawiamy wspólnie zoptymalizowaną architekturę neuronową do wykrywania wzmianek jednostek i rozproszczania jednostek, która modeluje otaczający kontekst na różnych poziomach granularności. Wykorzystujemy bazę wiedzy Wikidanych i dostępne zestawy danych odpowiadających na pytania do tworzenia wskaźników odniesienia podmiotów na dane odpowiadające pytaniom. Nasze podejście przewyższa poprzedni state-of-the-art system na tych danych, co powoduje średnią 8% poprawę wyniku końcowego. Ponadto pokazujemy, że nasz model zapewnia silne wyniki w różnych kategoriach podmiotów.', 'mn': 'Бүх мэдлэгийн суурь асуултын хариулт асуултын анхны шатан бол орлуулах асуултыг холбох юм. Бид асуулт хариулах үйлдлийн тухай холбоотой байгууллагын тухай судалгаа хийж, бүтээгдэхүүний мэдрэлийн архитектурыг нээлттэй, бүтээгдэхүүний холбоотой байгууллагуудыг өөр хэмжээний гранулагч байдлын орчин тойрон орчин тойрон байд Бид Wikidata мэдээллийн суурь, өгөгдлийн санд хариулт өгөгдлийн санг ашиглаж, асуулт хариулт өгөгдлийн талаар холбогдох нэгж бий болгож байна. Бидний арга хэмжээний өмнөх урлагийн тогтолцоог энэ өгөгдлийн хувьд дамжуулдаг. Эцсийн тооны дундаж 8% нь сайжруулсан. Бид загварын загвар нь өөр төрлийн загвар дээр хүчтэй үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Prima etapă a fiecărei abordări de răspuns la întrebările bazei de cunoștințe este de a lega entitățile în întrebarea de intrare. Investigăm legătura entităților în contextul sarcinii de răspuns la întrebări și prezentăm o arhitectură neurală optimizată în comun pentru detectarea mențiunilor entităților și dezambiguizarea entităților care modelează contextul înconjurător pe diferite niveluri de granularitate. Folosim baza de cunoștințe Wikidata și seturile de date disponibile pentru răspunsul la întrebări pentru a crea criterii de referință pentru conectarea entităților pe datele de răspuns la întrebări. Abordarea noastră depășește sistemul anterior de ultimă generație pe aceste date, rezultând o îmbunătățire medie de 8% a scorului final. De asemenea, demonstrăm că modelul nostru oferă o performanță puternică în diferite categorii de entități.', 'so': "Xarunta ugu horeeya ee su'aalaha aasaasiga aqoonta ee su'aalaha la jawaabayo waa in la xiriiro hay'adaha la xiriira su'aalka gudaha. Waxaan baaraynaa hay'adaha ku xiran marka lagu jiro arrimaha jawaabta, waxaana soo bandhigaynaa mid si wadajir ah u bedela dhismaha neurada, taas oo lagu qorayo aqoonsiga iyo qeybta, kaas oo sameynaya kooxaha ku wareegsan heerarka dhalashada kala duduwan. We use the Wikidata knowledge base and available question answering datasets to create benchmarks for entity linking on question answering data.  Dhaqdhaheenna wuxuu soo saaraa xaaladdii hore ee farshaxanta, taasoo sababtay ugu badnaanta qiyaastii ugu dambeeyey 8% beddelmay. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayagu uu sameynayo tababar xoog leh oo ku jira kooxo kala duduwan.", 'sv': 'Det första steget i varje kunskapsbas frågesvarsmetod är att länka entiteter i inmatningsfrågan. Vi undersöker entitetslänkning i samband med frågesvarsuppgift och presenterar en gemensamt optimerad neural arkitektur för entitetsomnämningsdetektering och entitetsdisambiguation som modellerar det omgivande sammanhanget på olika nivåer av granularitet. Vi använder Wikidata kunskapsbas och tillgängliga frågesvarsdata för att skapa riktmärken för entitetslänkar på frågesvarsdata. Vårt tillvägagångssätt överträffar det tidigare toppmoderna systemet på dessa data, vilket resulterar i en genomsnittlig förbättring av slutresultatet med 8%. Vi visar vidare att vår modell levererar en stark prestation inom olika enhetskategorier.', 'sr': 'Prva faza svakog pitanja baze znanja odgovara na pristup odgovora je povezati entitete na pitanje ulaska. Istražujemo entitet koji se povezuje u kontekstu odgovarajućeg zadatka pitanja i predstavljamo zajedno optimiziranu neuralnu arhitekturu za entitete koji spominju detektivu i disambiguaciju entiteta koje modele okruženog konteksta na različitim nivoima granularnosti. Koristimo bazu znanja Wikidata i dostupno pitanje koje odgovaraju na podatke kako bi stvorili kriterije za entitet koji povezuje na pitanje odgovarajuće podatke. Naš pristup iznosi prethodni sistem umetnosti na ovim podacima, što je rezultiralo prosjeèno poboljšanje konačnog rezultata od 8%. Dalje pokazujemo da naš model dostavlja jaku predstavu u raznim kategorijama entiteta.', 'ur': 'ہر علم بنسس سؤال کی پہلی مرحلہ جواب دینے کی تقریبا یہ ہے کہ انٹیٹیوں کو انٹیٹ سوال میں لینک کرنا ہے. ہم ایک ایستی کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جو سوال کی جواب دینے کے بارے میں متصل ہوتی ہے اور ایک ایستی کے ذریعے ایک نئورل معمار کی جگہ سے متصل ہوتی ہے جس کی مختلف طبقات پر اطراف کے متصل کی مدل کرتی ہے۔ ہم ویکیڈاٹا علم بنسس اور موجود سؤال کے جواب دینے والی ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے بونچمارک بنانے کے لئے سوال کے جواب دینے کے لئے بانچمارک بنانے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہمارا طریقہ اس ڈیٹا پر پہلے کی حالت-آرت سیسٹم کو فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے، اور اس کے نتیجہ میں آخری اسکور کے متوسط 8 درصد کی سوداگری ہوتی ہے۔ ہم اس سے زیادہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل مختلف اختیاروں میں ایک مضبوط فعالیت پہنچاتا ہے۔', 'si': 'හැම දැනගැනීමේ පළමු ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නය තමයි ඇතුළත් ප්\u200dරශ්නය අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න වැඩේ සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට න අපි විකිඩේටා දන්න අධ්\u200dයානය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට බෙන්ච්මා අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය මේ දත්තේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය වැඩ කරනවා, අන්තිම ප්\u200dරවේශනය 8% වැඩ කරනවා. අපි තවත් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක විවිධ වර්ගයක් වෙනුවෙන් ශක්තිමත් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට.', 'ta': 'ஒவ்வொரு அறிவு அடிப்படை கேள்வியின் முதல் நிலை உள்ளீட்டு கேள்வியில் பொருள்களை இணை நாம் கேள்வி பதில் செய்யும் சூழ்நிலையில் இணைக்கப்பட்ட பொருளை தேடுகிறோம் மற்றும் பொருள் குறிப்பிடுதல் மற்றும் பொருள் பிரிப்பு மற்றும் சூழல @ info இந்த தரவுகளில் முந்தைய நிலையில் கலை முறைமையை நிறைவேற்றும் நம் வழிமுறையில் செயல்படுத்துகிறது, சராசரியான 8% இறுதி மதி நாம் மேலும் காட்டுகிறோம் எங்கள் மாதிரி வேறு பொருள் வகுப்புகளுக்கு மேலும் ஒரு வலுவான செயல்பாட்ட', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz muammolar javob berish muvaffaqiyatlarida bogʻ'liq narsalarni tahrirlamiz va obʼektlarni aniqlash va obʼektlarni ajratish uchun birlashtirilgan neyural arxituvchini tahlil qilamiz va taʼminlovchi tizimni boshqa darajada o'zgartirish mumkin. @ info Our approach outperforms the previous state-of-the-art system on this data, resulting in an average 8% improvement of the final score.  Biz yana ko'rsatdik, modelmiz boshqa ma'lum turlariga juda katta ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Đầu tiên trong mỗi phương pháp trả lời câu hỏi của căn cứ kiến thức là liên kết các thực thể trong câu hỏi nhập. Chúng tôi điều tra các thực thể kết nối trong một nhiệm vụ trả lời câu hỏi và trình bày một kiến trúc thần kinh tối ưu cùng cho thực thể đề cập đến việc phát hiện và phân dạng thực thể mô tả bối cảnh xung quanh ở các mức độ hạt khác nhau. Chúng tôi sử dụng căn cứ kiến thức trên WikiLdata và câu hỏi có thể trả lời dữ liệu để tạo ra các tiêu chuẩn cho thực thể liên kết với các dữ liệu trả lời hỏi. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi hoàn thành hệ thống hiện đại trước đây về dữ liệu này, dẫn đến một tiến bộ tám số tiến bộ hơn số điểm cuối. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh rằng mô hình của chúng tôi đạt hiệu suất mạnh trong các hạng công ty khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Първият етап от всеки подход за отговор на въпроси от базата на знания е свързването на субектите във входящия въпрос. Изследваме свързването на единици в контекста на задачата за отговор на въпроси и представяме съвместно оптимизирана невронна архитектура за откриване на споменаване на единици и разграничаване на единици, която моделира околния контекст на различни нива на гранулираност. Използваме базата от знания на Уикиданни и наличните набори от данни за отговор на въпроси, за да създадем референтни показатели за свързване на субекти с данни за отговор на въпроси. Нашият подход надминава предишната най-съвременна система по тези данни, което води до средно 8% подобрение на крайния резултат. Освен това демонстрираме, че нашият модел осигурява силна производителност в различните категории субекти.', 'da': 'Den første fase af hver vidensbaseret spørgsmål besvarelse tilgang er at forbinde enheder i input spørgsmålet. Vi undersøger entity linking i forbindelse med spørgsmål besvarelse opgave og præsenterer en fælles optimeret neural arkitektur til entity omtale detektion og entity disambiguation, der modellerer den omgivende kontekst på forskellige niveauer af granularitet. Vi bruger Wikidata vidensbase og tilgængelige spørgsmålsbesvarelsesdatasæt til at skabe benchmarks for enhedslinking på spørgsmålsbesvarelsesdata. Vores tilgang overgår det tidligere state-of-the-art system på disse data, hvilket resulterer i en gennemsnitlig 8% forbedring af den endelige score. Vi viser endvidere, at vores model leverer en stærk præstation på tværs af forskellige enhedskategorier.', 'nl': 'De eerste fase van elke kennisbank vragenantwoordaanpak is het koppelen van entiteiten in de invoervraag. We onderzoeken entiteitskoppeling in de context van vragenantwoordtaak en presenteren een gezamenlijk geoptimaliseerde neurale architectuur voor entiteitsvermelding detectie en entiteitsverduidelijking die de omliggende context modelleert op verschillende niveaus van granulariteit. We gebruiken de Wikidata knowledge base en beschikbare vragenantwoorddatasets om benchmarks te creëren voor entiteitskoppelingen op vragenantwoordgegevens. Onze aanpak overtreft het vorige state-of-the-art systeem op deze gegevens, wat resulteert in een gemiddelde 8% verbetering van de eindscore. We tonen verder aan dat ons model sterke prestaties levert in verschillende entiteitscategorieën.', 'ko': '모든 지식 라이브러리 퀴즈 방법의 첫 번째 단계는 입력 문제의 실체를 연결하는 것이다.우리는 문답 임무 중의 실체 링크를 연구했고 실체 언급 검측과 실체 소멸에 사용되는 연합 최적화 신경 구조를 제시했다. 이 구조는 서로 다른 입도 단계에서 주위 환경을 모델링한다.Wikidata 지식 라이브러리와 사용 가능한 퀴즈 데이터 집합을 사용하여 퀴즈 데이터의 실체 링크를 위한 기준을 만듭니다.우리의 방법은 이 데이터에서 이전의 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 우수하여 최종 점수가 평균 8% 높아졌다.우리는 우리의 모델이 서로 다른 실체 유형에서 강력한 성능을 제공했다는 것을 한층 더 증명했다.', 'id': 'Tahap pertama dari setiap pertanyaan dasar pengetahuan menjawab pendekatan adalah menghubungkan entitas dalam pertanyaan input. Kami menyelidiki entitas yang menghubungkan dalam konteks jawaban pertanyaan tugas dan mempersembahkan arkitektur saraf yang bersama-sama optimisasi untuk entitas menyebutkan deteksi dan ketidakambiguasi entitas yang model konteks sekitar pada tingkat berbeda granularitas. Kami menggunakan pangkalan pengetahuan Wikidata dan pertanyaan tersedia menjawab set data untuk menciptakan benchmarks untuk entitas yang menghubungkan pada data menjawab pertanyaan. pendekatan kita melebihi sistem terbaik yang sebelumnya pada data ini, yang mengakibatkan rata-rata 8% peningkatan skor akhir. Kami lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa model kami memberikan prestasi yang kuat di seluruh kategori entitas yang berbeda.', 'de': 'Die erste Stufe jedes Ansatzes zur Beantwortung von Fragen in der Wissensdatenbank besteht darin, Entitäten in der Eingabefrage zu verknüpfen. Wir untersuchen Entity Linking im Kontext der Frageantwortaufgabe und präsentieren eine gemeinsam optimierte neuronale Architektur für Entity Erwähnung Detection und Entity Disambiguation, die den umgebenden Kontext auf verschiedenen Ebenen der Granularität modelliert. Wir verwenden die Wikidata Knowledge Base und verfügbare Fragebeantworter Datensätze, um Benchmarks für Entitätenverknüpfungen auf Fragebeantworter Daten zu erstellen. Unser Ansatz übertrifft das bisherige State-of-the-Art-System auf diesen Daten, was zu einer durchschnittlichen 8% Verbesserung des Endpunkts führt. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass unser Modell über verschiedene Unternehmenskategorien hinweg eine starke Leistung erbringt.', 'hr': 'Prva faza svakog pitanja baze znanja odgovarajućeg pristupa je povezati entitete na pitanje ulaznog pitanja. Istražujemo entitet koji se povezuje u kontekstu odgovarajućeg zadatka pitanja i predstavljamo zajedno optimiziranu neuralnu arhitekturu za otkrivanje subjekta i disambiguaciju subjekta koje modele okruženog konteksta na različitim razinama granularnosti. Koristimo bazu znanja Wikipodataka i dostupno pitanje odgovarajuće na podatke kako bi stvorili kriterije za podatke koje povezuju na pitanje odgovarajuće podatke. Naš pristup iznosi prethodni sustav umjetnosti na ovim podacima, što je rezultiralo prosječno poboljšanje konačnog rezultata od 8%. Dalje pokazujemo da naš model dostavlja jaku učinku u različitim kategorijama entiteta.', 'sw': 'Jukwaa la kwanza la kila maswali ya msingi wa maarifa ni kuwaunganisha vifaa katika swali la input. Tunafanya uchunguzi wa taasisi inayounganisha katika muktadha wa jukumu la maswali na kuweka ujenzi bora zaidi wa kiserikali kwa ajili ya kuutambua maudhui na utofauti wa vitengo ambavyo vinaonyesha mazingira yanayozunguka kuhusu kiwango tofauti cha uchunguzi. Tunatumia msingi wa maarifa ya Wikidata na maswali yanayopatikana kujibu seti za taarifa ili kutengeneza bendera kwa ajili ya taasisi inayohusiana na taarifa za kujibu maswali. Hatua yetu inaonyesha hali ya sanaa iliyopita katika takwimu hii, na kusababisha ongezeko la wastani wa asilimia 8 ya vipindi vya mwisho. Tunaonyesha zaidi kuwa mtindo wetu unatoa ufanisi mkubwa katika makundi tofauti.', 'tr': 'Her bilim temel soragynyň jogap bermegi üçin birinji sahypa girdi soragynda bir zatlary baglaşdyrmak. Biz soragyň jogap beren zadynyň kontekstinde baglanmagyny barýarys we birnäçe üýtgetmek üçin bir näus arhitekturlygyny a ýdyp kabul edip, taýýarlaryň üýtgetmesi we çäreleriň etrafynyň daýaryndaky sammyny beýleki derejesinde üýtgetmegi üçin bir topar optimiz Wikidata bilgi bazyny we bar soraglary jogap bermek üçin sistemi üçin bir soragy barlamak üçin bar. Bizim yaklaşımız bu verilerde öňki sanat sisteminin durumunu üstüne getirir. Sonuçta noktaların ortalaması 8% gelişmesine sebep oldu. Daha da nusgamyzyň farklı bir zat kategoriýasynda güýçli ukyplary saýlaýandygyny görkezýäris.', 'fa': 'اولین مرحله از هر سؤال بنیادی دانش جواب دادن به عنوان ارتباط برقراری شرکتها در سوال ورودی است. ما تحقیق می کنیم entity linking in the context of question response task and present a joint optimized neural architecture for entity mentioning detection and entity disambiguation that models the surrounding context on different levels of granularity. ما از پایگاه دانش ویکیدادا استفاده می\u200cکنیم و سوال موجود در پاسخ داده\u200cهای داده\u200cها برای ایجاد نقشه\u200cها برای ارتباط با ارتباط روی داده\u200cهای سوال استفاده می\u200cکنیم. دستور ما سیستم پیشینیان هنری را بر روی این اطلاعات انجام می دهد، و به نتیجه یک توسعه متوسط ۸ درصد بهترین امتیاز نهایی انجام می دهد. ما نمایش می\u200cدهیم که مدل ما یک عملکرد قوی در مجموعه\u200cهای متفاوت می\u200cکند.', 'sq': 'The first stage of every knowledge base question answering approach is to link entities in the input question.  Ne hetojmë njësinë që lidhet në kontekstin e detyrës për përgjigjen e pyetjeve dhe paraqesim një arkitekturë nervore të optimizuar së bashku për njësinë përmend zbulimin dhe çambiguarinë e njësisë që modelon kontekstin rrethues në nivele të ndryshme të granularitetit. Ne përdorim bazën e njohurive të Wikidata dhe pyetjet e disponueshme që përgjigjen për grupet e të dhënave për të krijuar referenca për njësinë që lidh në përgjigjen e të dhënave për pyetje. Përqasja jonë ekziston në sistemin e mëparshëm më të mirë të këtyre të dhënave, duke rezultuar në një përmirësim mesatar prej 8% të rezultatit përfundimtar. Ne demonstrojmë më tej se modeli ynë jep një shfaqje të fortë në kategori të ndryshme të njësive.', 'hy': 'The first stage of every knowledge base question answering approach is to link entities in the input question.  Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք կապված են հարցերի պատասխանատվության կոնտեքստում և ներկայացնում են առանձնահատկությունների համար միասին օպտիմացված նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, որը նշում է հայտնաբերությունը և առանձնահատկությունները, որոնք մոդե Մենք օգտագործում ենք Վիքիդատայի գիտելիքների հիմքը և հասանելի հարցերին պատասխանելու տվյալների համակարգերը, որպեսզի ստեղծենք համեմատական նպատակներ, որոնք կապված են հարցերին պատասխանելու տվյալների հետ: Մեր մոտեցումը գերազանցում է նախորդ ամենահետաքրքիր համակարգը այս տվյալների վրա, ինչը հանգեցնում է վերջնական գնահատականի միջին 8 տոկոսի բարելավմանը: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կատարում է ուժեղ արդյունք տարբեր անհատականության կատեգորիաներում:', 'af': "Die eerste stadium van elke kennis basis vraag antwoord toegang is om entiteite in die invoer vraag te skakel. Ons ondersoek entiteit wat in die konteks van vraag antwoord en voorsien 'n saamstig optimaliseerde neurale arkitektuur vir entiteit bepaal opdekking en entiteit-ontsammings wat model die omgewing konteks op verskillende vlakke van granulariteit. Ons gebruik die Wikidata kennisbasis en beskikbaar vraag wat antwoord datastelle om benchmarke te skep vir entiteit wat op vraag antwoord data te koppel. Ons toegang uitvoer die vorige state-of-the-art stelsel op hierdie data, wat resultaat in 'n gemiddelde 8% verbetering van die eindelike telling. Ons wys verder dat ons model 'n sterk prestasie oor verskillende entiteitkategorie verkry.", 'am': 'የእውቀት መቀመጫው የመጀመሪያው ደረጃ ነው፡፡ አካባቢውን በመቀበል ስራ ውስጥ የሚጠያየቁትን እና አካባቢነትን በተለየ ልዩ ደረጃዎች ላይ የሚያሳውቀውን እና አካባቢ ግንኙነትን እና በዙሪያው ያለውን ግንኙነት የሚያሳውቀውን እና አካባቢ መሠረትን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የWikidata እውቀት መቀመጫን እና የዳታዎችን መለስ ጥያቄን ለመፍጠር አካባቢውን በመጠየቅ ዳራዎችን ለመጠያየቅ አካባቢዎችን ለመፍጠር እንጠይቃለን፡፡ የፊተኛውን የዐርድ ሥርዓት ስርዓት የዚህን ዳታዎች አቀረበ፡፡ ዳግመኛም ምሳሌያችን በተለያዩ አካባቢ ክፍሎች ላይ ብርቱ የድምፅ እውቀት እንዲሰጥ እናሳይናለን፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রত্যেক জ্ঞানের বেস প্রশ্নের প্রথম পর্যায়ে ইনপুট প্রশ্নে বস্তুকে লিঙ্ক করার জন্য। প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্নের প্রেক্ষাপটে আমরা সংযুক্ত বস্তুকে তদন্ত করি এবং বস্তুকে উল্লেখ করার জন্য একটি যৌথ অপ্রাসঙ্গিক নিউরেল কাঠামো উপস্থাপন করি যা বিভিন্ন আমরা উইকিদাতা জ্ঞানের বেস ব্যবহার করি এবং প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্নের প্রশ্ন ব্যবহার করি প্রশ্নের তথ্য প্রশ্নের প্রশ্নের উত্ Our approach outperforms the previous state-of-the-art system on this data, resulting in an average 8% improvement of the final score.  আমরা আরো প্রমাণ করছি যে আমাদের মডেল বিভিন্ন বস্তুর বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের ক্ষেত্রে একটি শক্তিশালী প্', 'az': 'Hər bilimin əsas sualının cavab vermək approach ilk dəfəsi girdi sualında entitələri bağlamaqdır. Biz sual cavab verən işin məsələsində birlikdə bağlanmış bir məsələni araşdırırıq və bircə-birlikdə optimizlənmiş nöral arhitektürünü təşkil edirik ki, ətrafındakı məsələləri müxtəlif granularitın səviyyələrində modellər edər. Biz Wikidata elm bazını və verilən sual qurularını soruşmaq üçün süslü verilənlərə bağlanmaq üçün benchmarklər yaratmaq üçün istifadə edirik. Bizim tərzimiz bu məlumatların əvvəlki məlumatların məlumatlarının məlumatlarını üstün edir, sonuncu məlumatların ortalama 8%-ni yaxşılaşdırır. Daha sonra modellərimizin müxtəlif məxluqat kategoriyalarında güclü bir performansı sağlayacağını göstəririk.', 'ca': "La primera etapa de cada base de coneixement és connectar les entitats en la pregunta d'entrada. We investigate entity linking in the context of question answering task and present a jointly optimized neural architecture for entity mention detection and entity disambiguation that models the surrounding context on different levels of granularity.  Utilitzem la base de coneixements de Wikidata i els conjunts de dades disponibles en resposta a preguntes per crear punts de referència per a les entitats que s'enllacen en resposta a preguntes. El nostre enfocament supera el sistema més avançat anterior d'aquestes dades, resultant en una millora mitjana del 8% de la puntuació final. Ens demostrem que el nostre model dóna un fort rendiment a diferents categories d'entitats.", 'cs': 'První fází každého přístupu k odpovědi na otázky znalostní báze je propojení entit ve vstupní otázce. Vyšetřujeme propojení entit v kontextu úlohy zodpovězení otázek a prezentujeme společně optimalizovanou neuronovou architekturu pro detekci zmínek entit a rozšiřování entit, která modeluje okolní kontext na různých úrovních granularity. Využíváme znalostní bázi Wikidata a dostupné datové sady odpovědí na otázky k vytvoření referenčních měřítek pro propojení entit na data odpovědi na otázky. Náš přístup překonává předchozí nejmodernější systém na těchto údajích, což vede k průměrnému 8% zlepšení konečného skóre. Dále dokazujeme, že náš model přináší silný výkon napříč různými kategoriemi subjektů.', 'et': 'Iga teadmistebaasi küsimustele vastamise lähenemisviisi esimene etapp on siduda üksused sisendküsimuses. Uurime olemite sidumist küsimustele vastamise ülesande kontekstis ja esitame ühiselt optimeeritud neuraalarhitektuuri olemite mainimise tuvastamiseks ja olemite eristamiseks, mis modelleerib ümbritsevat konteksti erinevatel granulaarsustasemetel. Me kasutame Wikiandmete teadmistebaasi ja olemasolevaid küsimustele vastamise andmekogumeid, et luua võrdlusalused üksuste linkimiseks küsimustele vastamise andmetele. Meie lähenemisviis ületab nende andmete puhul eelmise tipptasemel süsteemi, mille tulemusel paraneb lõpptulemus keskmiselt 8%. Lisaks näitame, et meie mudel pakub tugevat jõudlust erinevates üksuste kategooriates.', 'fi': 'Jokaisen tietopohjan kysymyksiin vastaamisen lähestymistavan ensimmäinen vaihe on linkittää kokonaisuuksia syötekysymykseen. Tutkimme entiteettien linkittämistä kysymystehtävän kontekstissa ja esittelemme yhdessä optimoidun neuroarkkitehtuurin entiteettimainintojen havaitsemiseen ja entiteettien erottamiseen, joka mallintaa ympäröivää kontekstia eri granulariduustasoilla. Käytämme Wikidatan tietopohjaa ja saatavilla olevia kysymyksenvastaustietoja luodaksemme vertailukohtia kysymyksenvastaustietoihin linkittäville entiteeteille. Lähestymistapamme ylittää aiemman huippuluokan järjestelmän tässä datassa, mikä johtaa keskimäärin 8%:n parannukseen lopulliseen tulokseen. Osoitamme lisäksi, että mallimme tuottaa vahvaa suorituskykyä eri kokonaisuusluokaissa.', 'bs': 'Prva faza svakog pitanja baze znanja odgovara na pristup odgovora je povezivanje entiteta na pitanje ulaznog pitanja. Istražujemo entitet koji se povezuje u kontekstu odgovarajućeg zadatka pitanja i predstavljamo zajedno optimiziranu neuralnu arhitekturu za entitet koji spominje otkrivanje i disambiguaciju entiteta koje modele okruženog konteksta na različitim nivoima granularnosti. Koristimo bazu znanja Wikidata i dostupno pitanje koje odgovaraju na podatke kako bi stvorili kriterije za entitet koji povezuje na pitanje odgovarajuće podatke. Naš pristup iznosi prethodni sistem umjetnosti na ovim podacima, što je rezultiralo prosječnom poboljšanju 8% konačnog rezultata. Dalje pokazujemo da naš model dostavlja jaku predstavu u raznim kategorijama entiteta.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé kuwi tanggal kuwi saben kesempatan pangan ing nguasai éwé kawit karo perusahaan langkung sampek. Awak dhéwé éntuk kelompok nggawe ing sakjane sampek aturan sing nguasal nêmên karo sakjane mepe nggawe Arkturatura Neral nggawe barang kelompok nggawe nguasal terus éntuk sampek karo paké sampek deweke nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk kelompok wigatahan kanggo sabanjuré dataset nggantawak dhéwé nggawe bench-arahan kanggo nganggo mulai persok sabanjuré data. Ndheke nambah sing wis ngerasakno sistem sing dumadhi-kanggo kuwi nggawe dadi iki, dadi sing wis ngerasakno kanggo kalagayaan 8% sing apik dhéwé ngerasakno Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno ngono akeh model nyebuté nggawe kesempatan karo kategori sing gak bener.', 'ha': "Jire ta farko daga kowane maswalin bassi na ilmi ya jibu zuwa zuwa shirin abubuwa cikin tambayin da aka shigar. Tuna ƙidãya masu halin da ke haɗa cikin mazaunin mai tambaya kuma muna halatar da wani matsayin neural wanda aka fi amfani da shi a haɗi dõmin gano na abun da ɓangaren abun da gaskiyar da ke nuna mazaɓa da muhallin wanda ke kẽwayen a kan zane-zane-zane-zane. Tuna amfani da banza zane na Wikidata da masu tambayi da ake iya samun sunan da za'a iya sami tsarin da za'a iya ƙiƙiro bongon wa abun da ya yi danna da samun sunan tambaya. Mataimakinmu ta fara halin-sanar na farko a kan wannan data, na ƙara gaba ɗaya da ya kyautata nau'in na ƙari. Tuna bayan bayani kawai misalinmu yana samar da wani mai ƙarfi a cikin wasu jama'a dabam-dabam.", 'sk': 'Prva faza vsakega pristopa odgovarjanja na vprašanja baze znanja je povezava entitet v vhodnem vprašanju. Raziskujemo povezovanje entitet v kontekstu naloge odgovarjanja na vprašanja in predstavljamo skupno optimizirano nevronsko arhitekturo za odkrivanje entitet in razločitev entitet, ki modelira okoliški kontekst na različnih ravneh granularnosti. Uporabljamo Wikipodatkovno bazo znanja in razpoložljive nabore podatkov za odgovore na vprašanja za ustvarjanje referenčnih meril za povezovanje entitet na podatke za odgovore na vprašanja. Naš pristop presega prejšnji najsodobnejši sistem pri teh podatkih, kar ima za posledico povprečno 8% izboljšanje končnega rezultata. Dodatno dokazujemo, da naš model zagotavlja močno učinkovitost v različnih kategorijah subjektov.', 'he': 'השלב הראשון של כל שאלות בסיס הידע שענות על גישה הוא לקשר יחסים בשאלת הכניסה. אנו חוקרים יחידה שקשורה בתוך הקשר של משימה לענות על שאלות ומציג ארכיטקטורה עצבית אופטימית משותפת עבור יחידה אנחנו משתמשים בסיס הידע של ויקידאטה ושאלות זמינות עונות על קבוצות נתונים כדי ליצור נקודות רמז ליחידות שקשורות על עניין נתונים על שאלות. הגישה שלנו עולה על מערכת המצב המיוחד הקודמת על הנתונים האלה, מה שהוביל לשיפור בממוצע של 8% מהנקודה הסופית. אנו מוכיחים יותר שמודל שלנו מספק ביצועים חזקים בקטגוריות ישויות שונות.', 'bo': 'ཤེས་ཚོའི་གཞི་རྟེན་འདྲི་ཚིག་གི་གནད་སྐོར་དང་པོ་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་འཛུལ་སྒྲིག་གི་གོ་རེ་ཡོད། We investigate entity linking in the context of question answering task and present a jointly optimized neural architecture for entity mention detection and entity disambiguation that models the surrounding context on different levels of granularity. We use the Wikidata knowledge base and available question answering datasets to create benchmarks for entity linking on question answering data. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱིས་སྔོན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་བ་དེ་གནས་སྟངས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འཕར་རིམ་བཞིན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་སྔོན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཞུང་གིས་དབྱེ་བ་མ་འདྲ་བར་སྟོན་པའི་གོང་འཕེལ་བ་སྐྱེས་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དེ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Quantitative Semantic Variation in the Contexts of Concrete and Abstract Words', 'ar': 'التباين الدلالي الكمي في سياقات الكلمات الملموسة والمجردة', 'fr': 'Variation sémantique quantitative dans le contexte de mots concrets et abstraits', 'pt': 'Variação Semântica Quantitativa nos Contextos de Palavras Concretas e Abstratas', 'es': 'Variación semántica cuantitativa en los contextos de palabras concretas y abstractas', 'ja': '具体的および抽象的な単語の文脈における量的意味変動', 'zh': '事与抽象词语境中定量语义变异', 'hi': 'कंक्रीट और अमूर्त शब्दों के संदर्भों में मात्रात्मक शब्दार्थ भिन्नता', 'ru': 'Количественная семантическая вариация в контексте конкретных и абстрактных слов', 'ga': 'Athrú Séimeantach Cainníochtúil i gComhthéacsanna na bhFocal Coincréite agus Teibí', 'ka': 'კონკრეტური და აბსტრაქტური სიტყვების კონტექსტებში', 'hu': 'Mennyiségi szemantikus változás a beton és absztrakt szavak kontextusában', 'el': 'Ποσοτική σημασιολογική διακύμανση στα πλαίσια συγκεκριμένων και αφηρημένων λέξεων', 'kk': 'Конкреттің және абстракттік сөздер контекстінде көлемтік семантикалық айнымалысы', 'lt': 'Kiekybinis semantinis pokytis konkrečių ir abstrakčių žodžių kontekste', 'it': 'Variazione semantica quantitativa nei contesti di parole concrete e astratte', 'mk': 'Квантитативна семантична варијација во контекстот на конкретни и апстрактни зборови', 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dക്രീറ്റിന്റെയും അബ്രാക്ട്രാക്ട്രാറ്റ് വാക്കുകളുടെയും ഉള്ളിലെ ക്വാന്റിവ് സെമാന്റിക് മ', 'mn': 'Конкрет болон абстракт үгнүүдийн тооны семантик өөрчлөлт', 'ms': 'Variasi Semantik Kuantitif dalam Konteks Kata Konkret dan Abstrakt', 'mt': 'Quantitative Semantic Variation in the Contexts of Concrete and Abstract Words', 'no': 'Kvantitativ semiantisk variasjon i kontekstane av beton og abstrakt ord', 'ro': 'Variaţia semantică cantitativă în contextul cuvintelor concrete şi abstracte', 'pl': 'Ilościowa zmiana semantyczna w kontekście słów konkretnych i abstrakcyjnych', 'sr': 'Kvantitativna semantična varijacija u kontekstima betona i abstrakta reči', 'si': 'කෝන්ක්\u200dරීට් සහ අභ්\u200dයාසය වචන වර්තනයේ ක්\u200dරමාත්මක සෙමාන්තික වෙනස', 'so': 'Quantitative Semantic Variation in the Contexts of Concrete and Abstract Words', 'ta': 'கான்கிரீட் மற்றும் வார்த்தைகளின் உள்ளடக்கங்களில் குவாண்டிய செமான்டிக் மாற்றம்', 'sv': 'Kvantitativ semantisk variation i kontexterna av konkreta och abstrakta ord', 'ur': 'کنکریٹ اور ابسٹرک کلمات کی کنٹکسٹ میں منطقی سیمنٹی ویرایش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Biến dạng phân biệt chủng tộc trong các sự cạnh tranh của các từ Concrete và abstract', 'bg': 'Количествена семантична вариация в контекста на конкретни и абстрактни думи', 'nl': 'Kwantitatieve semantische variatie in de context van concrete en abstracte woorden', 'hr': 'Kvantitativna semantična varijacija u kontekstima betonskih i abstraktivnih riječi', 'da': 'Kvantitativ semantisk variation i konteksten af beton og abstrakte ord', 'id': 'Variasi Semantik Kuantitif dalam Konteks Kata Konkrit dan Abstrakt', 'de': 'Quantitative semantische Variation im Kontext konkreter und abstrakter Wörter', 'ko': '구체어와 추상어 어경 중의 수량적 의미 변이', 'fa': 'تغییرات منطقه\u200cای در محیط کلمه\u200cهای کنکریت و ابستراکت', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko ya kimapenzi katika Mazingira ya Mikondari na Mabadiliko', 'af': 'Kwantiteit Semantiese Verandering in die Konteks van Konkrút en Abstrakte Woorde', 'sq': 'Variacioni Quantitativ Semantic në Kontekstin e Fjalëve Konkrete dhe Abstrakte', 'tr': 'Konkret ve Abstrakt sözlerin kontekstlerinde ölçülik semitik üýtgeşigi', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Konkret v톛 Abstrakt S칬zl톛rin Kontekstl톛rind톛 Kvantitatl캼 Semantik T톛r톛fl톛r', 'bn': 'কনক্রিট এবং আবর্জনা শব্দের মধ্যে কোয়ান্টিটেটিভ সেম্যান্টিক বিবর্তন', 'hy': 'Կանտավորական սեմատիկ տարբերակը կոնտեքստում', 'bs': 'Kvantitativna semantična varijacija u kontekstima betonskih i abstraktivnih riječi', 'et': 'Kvantitatiivne semantiline variatsioon konkreetsete ja abstraktsete sõnade kontekstis', 'ca': 'Variació Semàtica Quantitativa en el Context de paraules concretes i abstractes', 'cs': 'Kvantitativní sémantická variace v kontextu konkrétních a abstraktních slov', 'fi': 'Quantitatiivinen semanttinen vaihtelu konkreettisten ja abstraktien sanojen konteksteissa', 'jv': 'Variation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'שינוי סמנטי Quantitative בתוך הקונקסטים של מילים קבוצות ואבסטרקטיות', 'sk': 'Kvantitativna semantična variacija v kontekstih konkretnih in abstraktnih besed', 'bo': 'ཚོས་གཞི་དང་ཕྱེད་པའི་ཡི་གེ'}
{'en': 'Across disciplines, researchers are eager to gain insight into empirical features of abstract vs. concrete concepts. In this work, we provide a detailed characterisation of the distributional nature of abstract and concrete words across 16,620 English nouns, verbs and adjectives. Specifically, we investigate the following questions : (1) What is the distribution of concreteness in the contexts of concrete and abstract target words? (2) What are the differences between concrete and abstract words in terms of contextual semantic diversity? (3) How does the entropy of concrete and abstract word contexts differ? Overall, our studies show consistent differences in the distributional representation of concrete and abstract words, thus challenging existing theories of cognition and providing a more fine-grained description of their nature.', 'ar': 'عبر التخصصات ، يتوق الباحثون لاكتساب نظرة ثاقبة للسمات التجريبية للمفاهيم المجردة مقابل المفاهيم الملموسة. في هذا العمل ، نقدم توصيفًا تفصيليًا للطبيعة التوزيعية للكلمات المجردة والملموسة عبر 16،620 اسمًا وأفعالًا وصفات إنجليزية. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بالتحقيق في الأسئلة التالية: (1) ما هو توزيع الملموسة في سياقات الكلمات الهدف الملموسة والمجردة؟ (2) ما هي الاختلافات بين الكلمات الملموسة والمجردة من حيث التنوع الدلالي السياقي؟ (3) كيف تختلف إنتروبيا سياقات الكلمات الملموسة والمجردة؟ بشكل عام ، تُظهر دراساتنا اختلافات ثابتة في التمثيل التوزيعي للكلمات الملموسة والمجردة ، وبالتالي تتحدى نظريات الإدراك الحالية وتوفر وصفًا أكثر دقة لطبيعتها.', 'fr': "Dans toutes les disciplines, les chercheurs sont désireux de mieux comprendre les caractéristiques empiriques des concepts abstraits par rapport aux concepts concrets. Dans ce travail, nous fournissons une caractérisation détaillée de la nature distributionnelle de mots abstraits et concrets à travers 16 620 noms, verbes et adjectifs anglais. Plus précisément, nous étudions les questions suivantes\xa0: (1) Quelle est la distribution du caractère concret dans les contextes de mots cibles concrets et abstraits\xa0? (2) Quelles sont les différences entre les mots concrets et abstraits en termes de diversité sémantique contextuelle\xa0? (3) En quoi l'entropie des contextes de mots concrets et abstraits diffère-t-elle\xa0? Dans l'ensemble, nos études montrent des différences constantes dans la représentation distributionnelle des mots concrets et abstraits, remettant ainsi en question les théories existantes de la cognition et fournissant une description plus fine de leur nature.", 'pt': 'Em todas as disciplinas, os pesquisadores estão ansiosos para obter informações sobre as características empíricas de conceitos abstratos versus conceitos concretos. Neste trabalho, fornecemos uma caracterização detalhada da natureza distributiva de palavras abstratas e concretas em 16.620 substantivos, verbos e adjetivos em inglês. Especificamente, investigamos as seguintes questões: (1) Qual é a distribuição da concretude nos contextos de palavras-alvo concretas e abstratas? (2) Quais são as diferenças entre palavras concretas e abstratas em termos de diversidade semântica contextual? (3) Como a entropia de contextos de palavras concretos e abstratos diferem? No geral, nossos estudos mostram diferenças consistentes na representação distributiva de palavras concretas e abstratas, desafiando assim as teorias existentes de cognição e fornecendo uma descrição mais refinada de sua natureza.', 'es': 'En todas las disciplinas, los investigadores están ansiosos por obtener información sobre las características empíricas de los conceptos abstractos frente a los concretos. En este trabajo, proporcionamos una caracterización detallada de la naturaleza distributiva de palabras abstractas y concretas en 16.620 sustantivos, verbos y adjetivos en inglés. Específicamente, investigamos las siguientes preguntas: (1) ¿Cuál es la distribución de la concreción en los contextos de palabras objetivo concretas y abstractas? (2) ¿Cuáles son las diferencias entre palabras concretas y abstractas en términos de diversidad semántica contextual? (3) ¿En qué se diferencia la entropía de los contextos de palabras concretas y abstractas? En general, nuestros estudios muestran diferencias consistentes en la representación distributiva de palabras concretas y abstractas, desafiando así las teorías existentes de la cognición y proporcionando una descripción más detallada de su naturaleza.', 'ja': '分野を超えて、研究者は抽象的な概念と具体的な概念の経験的特徴についての洞察を得ることを熱望している。この研究では、16,620の英語の名詞、動詞、および形容詞にわたる抽象的および具体的な単語の分布性の詳細な特徴付けを提供します。具体的には、次のような疑問を検討する。（ 1 ）具体的な抽象的な対象語の文脈における具体性の分布はどのようなものか？ （ 2 ）文脈的な意味の多様性の観点から、具体的な単語と抽象的な単語の違いは何か？ （ 3 ）具体的な単語の文脈と抽象的な単語の文脈のエントロピーはどのように異なるか？全体的に、私たちの研究は、具体的な単語と抽象的な単語の分布表現の一貫した違いを示しているため、既存の認知理論に挑戦し、それらの性質のより細かい説明を提供します。', 'zh': '跨学科者,治人之深知抽象概念与其二也。 于此之事,详细描述象单词于16,620英语名词,动词形容词布性。 (1)在其上下文,具体性者何? (2)在语境语义多样性,其词与抽象词有何异? (3)与抽象词语境熵何异? 总体而言者,吾之论明,与抽象之分布同异,以挑战见知之论,而更细粒其质也。', 'hi': 'विषयों में, शोधकर्ता अमूर्त बनाम ठोस अवधारणाओं की अनुभवजन्य विशेषताओं में अंतर्दृष्टि प्राप्त करने के लिए उत्सुक हैं। इस काम में, हम 16,620 अंग्रेजी संज्ञाओं, क्रियाओं और विशेषणों में अमूर्त और ठोस शब्दों की वितरणात्मक प्रकृति का एक विस्तृत चरित्र चित्रण प्रदान करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम निम्नलिखित प्रश्नों की जांच करते हैं: (1) ठोस और अमूर्त लक्ष्य शब्दों के संदर्भों में कंक्रीटनेस का वितरण क्या है? (2) प्रासंगिक शब्दार्थ विविधता के संदर्भ में ठोस और अमूर्त शब्दों के बीच अंतर क्या हैं? (3) ठोस और अमूर्त शब्द संदर्भों की एन्ट्रॉपी कैसे भिन्न होती है? कुल मिलाकर, हमारे अध्ययन ठोस और अमूर्त शब्दों के वितरणात्मक प्रतिनिधित्व में लगातार अंतर दिखाते हैं, इस प्रकार अनुभूति के मौजूदा सिद्धांतों को चुनौती देते हैं और उनकी प्रकृति का अधिक बारीक विवरण प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Во всех дисциплинах исследователи стремятся получить представление об эмпирических особенностях абстрактных и конкретных концепций. В этой работе мы приводим подробную характеристику дистрибутивного характера абстрактных и конкретных слов в 16 620 английских существительных, глаголов и прилагательных. В частности, мы исследуем следующие вопросы: (1) Каково распределение конкретности в контексте конкретных и абстрактных целевых слов? (2) Каковы различия между конкретными и абстрактными словами с точки зрения контекстного семантического разнообразия? (3) Чем отличается энтропия контекстов конкретных и абстрактных слов? В целом, наши исследования показывают последовательные различия в распределенном представлении конкретных и абстрактных слов, тем самым оспаривая существующие теории познания и предоставляя более детальное описание их природы.', 'ga': 'Ar fud disciplíní, tá fonn ar thaighdeoirí léargas a fháil ar ghnéithe eimpíreacha de choincheapa teibí vs coincréit. Sa saothar seo, tugaimid cur síos mionsonraithe ar nádúr dáileacháin na bhfocal teibí agus nithiúla trasna 16,620 ainmfhocal, briathar agus aidiacht Bhéarla. Go sonrach, déanaimid imscrúdú ar na ceisteanna seo a leanas: (1) Cad é dáileadh coincréitithe i gcomhthéacs spriocfhocail nithiúla agus teibí? (2) Cad iad na difríochtaí idir focail nithiúla agus teibí i dtéarmaí éagsúlacht shéimeantach chomhthéacsúil? (3) Conas atá eantrópacht comhthéacsanna nithiúla agus teibí focal? Tríd is tríd, léiríonn ár gcuid staidéir difríochtaí comhsheasmhacha i léiriú dáileacháin na bhfocal nithiúla agus teibí, rud a thugann dúshlán na dteoiricí cognaíochta atá ann cheana agus a sholáthraíonn cur síos níos míne ar a nádúr.', 'ka': 'დისპლიონტების განმავლობაში, მსწავლობები ძალიან დაიწყებენ აბსტრაქტის და კონკრეტური კონფექტების ემპრიკალური ფუნქციების შესახებ. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ აბსტრაქტის და კონკრეტული სიტყვების გარეშე 16 620 ანგლისური სიტყვები, გერბები და აექექტიგების განსაზღვრებული პერაკრატიფიკაციას გვეყენებთ. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ შევსწავლობთ შემდეგი კითხვები: (1) რა არის კონკრეტური და აბსტრაქტური სიტყვების განსაკუთრება? (2) რა არის კონკრეტური და აბსტრაქტური სიტყვების განსხვავებები კონტექსტური სმენტიკური განსხვავებაზე? (3) როგორ კონკრეტური და აბსტრაქტური სიტყვების ენტროპია განსხვავებულია? ჩვენი სწავლებები აჩვენებენ კონკრეტული და აბსტრაქტური სიტყვების განსხვავებას, რომლებიც კონციონის თეორიების შესაძლებლობად, და უფრო სწორედ განსხვავებენ ისინი სახელის განსხვავებას', 'hu': 'A tudományágak között a kutatók szeretnének betekintést nyerni az absztrakt kontra konkrét fogalmak empirikus jellemzőibe. Ebben a munkában 16 620 angol főneven, igén és melléknéven részletesen bemutatjuk az absztrakt és konkrét szavak eloszlási jellegét. Konkrétan a következő kérdéseket vizsgáljuk: (1) Mi a konkrétség eloszlása konkrét és absztrakt célszavak kontextusában? (2) Milyen különbségek vannak a konkrét és az absztrakt szavak között a kontextuális szemantikai sokszínűség tekintetében? (3) Hogyan különbözik a konkrét és absztrakt szókontextusok entrópiája? Összességében tanulmányaink konkrét és absztrakt szavak eloszlási megjelenítésében következetes különbségeket mutatnak, így kihívják a meglévő kognitív elméleteket, és finomabb leírást nyújtanak természetükről.', 'el': 'Σε όλους τους κλάδους, οι ερευνητές είναι πρόθυμοι να αποκτήσουν γνώση των εμπειρικών χαρακτηριστικών αφηρημένων vs. συγκεκριμένων εννοιών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρέχουμε έναν λεπτομερή χαρακτηρισμό της κατανεμητικής φύσης των αφηρημένων και συγκεκριμένων λέξεων σε 16.620 αγγλικά ουσιαστικά, ρήματα και επίθετα. Συγκεκριμένα, διερευνούμε τα ακόλουθα ερωτήματα: (1) Ποια είναι η κατανομή της συγκεκριμένης πραγματικότητας στα πλαίσια συγκεκριμένων και αφηρημένων λέξεων-στόχων; (2) Ποιες είναι οι διαφορές μεταξύ συγκεκριμένων και αφηρημένων λέξεων όσον αφορά τη σημασιολογική πολυμορφία του περιβάλλοντος; (3) Πώς διαφέρει η εντροπία των συγκεκριμένων και αφηρημένων λέξεων; Συνολικά, οι μελέτες μας δείχνουν συνεπείς διαφορές στην κατανομή των συγκεκριμένων και αφηρημένων λέξεων, αμφισβητώντας έτσι τις υπάρχουσες θεωρίες της γνώσης και παρέχοντας μια πιο λεπτή περιγραφή της φύσης τους.', 'it': "Attraverso le discipline, i ricercatori sono desiderosi di ottenere comprensione delle caratteristiche empiriche di concetti astratti vs. concreti. In questo lavoro, forniamo una caratterizzazione dettagliata della natura distributiva delle parole astratte e concrete attraverso 16.620 sostantivi, verbi e aggettivi inglesi. Nello specifico, esaminiamo le seguenti domande: (1) Qual è la distribuzione della concretezza nei contesti delle parole target concrete e astratte? (2) Quali sono le differenze tra parole concrete e astratte in termini di diversità semantica contestuale? (3) Come differisce l'entropia dei contesti verbali concreti e astratti? Nel complesso, i nostri studi mostrano differenze coerenti nella rappresentazione distributiva di parole concrete e astratte, sfidando così le teorie esistenti della cognizione e fornendo una descrizione più fine della loro natura.", 'lt': 'Mokslininkai visose srityse nori sužinoti empirinius abstrakčių ir konkrečių koncepcijų požymius. Šiame darbe išsamiai apibūdinami abstraktūs ir konkretūs žodžiai 16 620 anglų vardų, žodžių ir priedų. Konkrečiai mes tiriame šiuos klausimus: 1) Koks konkretumo pasiskirstymas konkrečių ir abstrakčių tikslinių žodžių kontekste? (2) Kokie yra konkrečių ir abstrakčių žodžių skirtumai atsižvelgiant į kontekstinę semantinę įvairovę? (3) Kaip skiriasi konkretaus ir abstraktaus žodžių konteksto entropija? Apskritai mūsų tyrimai rodo nuoseklius konkrečių ir abstrakčių žodžių platinimo skirtumus, todėl kyla iššūkis esamoms pažinimo teorijoms ir pateikiamas išsamesnis jų pobūdžio aprašymas.', 'kk': 'Дисплейлердің арасында зерттеушілер абстракты конкреттік концепциялардың эмпирикалық қасиеттерін түсінуге күтпейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз ағылшын атаулар, вербалар және бөлімдердің үлкен сөздердің көбірек түрін 16 620 ағылшын атаулар, тілкелер және бөлімдердің көбірек түрін таңдап бер Ескерілікті, біз келесі сұрақтарды зерттейміз: (1) Конкреттік және абстракттік сөздердің жағдайда тәуелсіздік үлестіріміз не? (2) Конкретті мен абстракттік сөздер арасындағы қандай айырмашылығы керек? (3) Конкретті және абстракттік сөздердің ентропиясы қалай айырылады? Біздің зерттеулеріміз конкретті және абстракттік сөздерді тарату үшін тәуелді айырмашылықтарын көрсетеді, сондықтан білім теориясын көмектеседі және олардың табиғатын түсініктемесін көмектеседі.', 'ms': 'Di seluruh disiplin, peneliti bersemangat untuk mendapatkan pandangan pada ciri-ciri empirik konsep abstrak vs. konkrit. Dalam kerja ini, kami memberikan ciri-ciri terperinci sifat distribusi perkataan abstrak dan konkrit melalui 16,620 nama Inggeris, verb dan adjektif. Secara khusus, kami menyelidiki soalan berikut: (1) Apa pendapatan ketepatan dalam konteks kata-kata sasaran konkrit dan abstrak? (2) Apakah perbezaan antara perkataan konkrit dan abstrak dalam terma perbezaan semantik kontekstual? (3) Bagaimana entropi konteks perkataan konkrit dan abstrak berbeza? Secara keseluruhan, kajian kami menunjukkan perbezaan konsisten dalam perwakilan distribusi perkataan konkrit dan abstrakt, sehingga menantang teori pengetahuan yang wujud dan menyediakan deskripsi sifat mereka yang lebih baik.', 'ml': 'ഡിസ്കിപ്ലൈനുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കാന്\u200d ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, അബ്ട്രാക്റ്റിന്റെ കോണ്\u200d ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വിശദീകരണവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊടുക്കുന്നു. 16,620 ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പൂജ്യങ്ങള്\u200d, വാര്\u200dപ്പുകള്\u200d എന്നിവയുടെ വിതരണ സ്വഭാവവ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d താഴെയുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു: (1) കോണ്\u200dക്രീറ്റ് വാക്കുകളുടെ വിഭാഗം എന്താണ്? (2) കോണ്\u200dക്രീറ്റ് വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസം എന്താണ്? (3) കോണ്\u200dക്രീറ്റിന്റെ എന്\u200dട്രോപ്പി എങ്ങനെയാണ് വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നത്? മൊത്തം, നമ്മുടെ പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d കോണ്\u200dക്രീറ്റ് വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയിലും വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് നിലവിലുള്ള പരിചയപ്രക', 'mk': 'Покрај дисциплините, истражувачите се желни да добијат сфаќање за емпиричките карактеристики на апстрактни против конкретни концепти. Во оваа работа, ние обезбедуваме детална карактеризација на дистрибуционалната природа на апстрактни и конкретни зборови преку 16.620 англиски именици, декларации и приклучоци. Специфично, ги истражуваме следните прашања: (1) Која е дистрибуцијата на конкретноста во контекстот на конкретни и апстрактни метни зборови? (2) Кои се разликите помеѓу конкретните и апстрактните зборови во поглед на контекстната семантична различност? (3) Како се разликува ентропијата на конкретните и апстрактните контексти на зборовите? Вкупно, нашите студии покажуваат константни разлики во дистрибутивното претставување на конкретни и апстрактни зборови, со што се предизвикуваат постоечките теории на когнитијата и обезбедуваат пофин опис на нивната природа.', 'mt': 'Fuq id-dixxiplini, ir-riċerkaturi huma ħerqana li jiksbu għarfien dwar il-karatteristiċi empiriċi ta’ kunċetti astratti kontra konkreti. F’dan ix-xogħol, nagħtu karatterizzazzjoni dettaljata tan-natura distributtiva tal-kliem astratt u konkret f’16,620 isem Ingliż, verbs u a ġġettivi. Speċifikament, ninvestigaw il-mistoqsijiet li ġejjin: (1) X’inhi d-distribuzzjoni tal-konkretezza fil-kuntest ta’ kliem fil-mira konkret u astratt? (2) X’inhuma d-differenzi bejn kliem konkret u astratt f’termini ta’ diversità semantika kuntestwali? (3) Kif ivarjaw l-entropija tal-kuntesti tal-kliem konkreti u astratti? B’mod ġenerali, l-istudji tagħna juru differenzi konsistenti fir-rappreżentazzjoni distributtiva ta’ kliem konkret u astratt, u b’hekk jisfidaw it-teoriji eżistenti tal-konoxximent u jipprovdu deskrizzjoni aktar fina tan-natura tagħhom.', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухаан дээр судлаачид abstract versus concrete ойлголтын эмператик чанарыг ойлгохыг хүсдэг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид 16 620 Англи хэлний нэр, үг болон нэршилтүүдийн хуваарилалтын байдлын нарийвчлалтай харуулж байна. Ялангуяа, бид дараагийн асуултуудыг судалж байна: (1) Конкретний, abstract зорилготой үгнүүдийн тодорхойлолтын хуваарилалт хэд вэ? (2) Конкрет болон абстракт үгнүүдийн ялгаа юу вэ? (3) Конкрет, абстракт үгний энтропи хэрхэн ялгаатай вэ? Ихэнх судалгаанууд конкрет, abstract үгнүүдийн хуваарилалтын ялгааг харуулдаг. Иймээс бидний мэдэх теорийг шаардлагатай, тэдний байгалийн илүү сайхан тодорхойлдог.', 'pl': 'W różnych dyscyplinach naukowcy chętnie uzyskają wgląd w empiryczne cechy abstrakcyjnych a konkretnych koncepcji. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy szczegółową charakterystykę rozkładu abstrakcyjnych i konkretnych słów na 16,620 angielskich rzeczowników, czasowników i przymiotników. W szczególności badamy następujące pytania: (1) Jaki jest rozkład konkretności w kontekście konkretnych i abstrakcyjnych słów docelowych? (2) Jakie są różnice między konkretnymi i abstrakcyjnymi słowami pod względem kontekstowej różnorodności semantycznej? (3) Jak różni się entropia konkretnych i abstrakcyjnych kontekstów słowowych? Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, nasze badania wykazują konsekwentne różnice w reprezentacji dystrybucyjnej konkretnych i abstrakcyjnych słów, kwestionując tym samym istniejące teorie poznania i dostarczając bardziej precyzyjnego opisu ich charakteru.', 'no': 'På discipliner er forskere ønskjer å få innsikt i empiriske funksjonar av abstrakt mot beton-konseptar. I dette arbeidet gjev vi detaljert karakterisering av den distribusjonelle naturen av abstrakt og beton ord over 16 620 engelske namn, verbar og adjektiv. Spesielt er vi undersøk følgjande spørsmål: (1) Kva er distribusjonen av konkretet i kontekstane av beton og abstrakt målord? (2) Kva er ulike forskjeller mellom beton og abstrakt ord ved hjelp av kontekstalt semantisk mangfold? (3) Korleis forskjeller entropien av beton og abstrakt ordkontekstar? Overalt viser studiane våre konsistent forskjeller i den distribusjonelle representasjonen av beton og abstrakte ord, slik at det utfordrer eksisterande teorier om kognisjon og gjer ei meir fyrke skildring av naturen sine.', 'ro': 'În toate disciplinele, cercetătorii sunt dornici să obțină o perspectivă asupra caracteristicilor empirice ale conceptelor abstracte vs. concrete. În această lucrare, oferim o caracterizare detaliată a naturii distribuționale a cuvintelor abstracte și concrete pe 16.620 de substantive, verbe și adjective în limba engleză. În mod specific, investigăm următoarele întrebări: (1) Care este distribuția concretenței în contextul cuvintelor țintă concrete și abstracte? (2) Care sunt diferențele dintre cuvintele concrete și abstracte în ceea ce privește diversitatea semantică contextuală? (3) Cum diferă entropia contextelor concrete și abstracte de cuvinte? În general, studiile noastre arată diferențe consistente în reprezentarea distribuțională a cuvintelor concrete și abstracte, provocând astfel teoriile existente ale cunoașterii și oferind o descriere mai fină a naturii lor.', 'sr': 'Kroz discipline, istraživači žele da dobiju uvid u empiričke karakteristike apstrakta protiv betonskih koncepta. U ovom poslu pružamo detaljnu karakterizaciju distribucijske prirode apstrakta i betonskih reèi preko 16.620 engleskih imena, verba i adjektiva. Posebno istražujemo sljedeća pitanja: (2) Kakve su razlike između betonskih i apstraktnih reči u smislu kontekstualne semantičke raznolikosti? (3) Kako se entropija betonskih i abstraktivnih reèi razlikuje? Naše studije pokazuju konsekventne razlike u raspodjelnoj predstavi betonskih i apstraktnih reči, tako izazivajući postojeće teorije kognicije i pružajući detaljniji opis njihove prirode.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාපකයෙන්, පරීක්ෂකයෝ බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාපකයෙන් අ මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 16,620 ඉංග්\u200dරීසියානු නම්, වාර්ත්ම විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය පරීක්ෂා කරනවා: (1) කොන්ක්\u200dරීට් සහ අල්ලගැනීම් වචන වලගේ සම්බන්ධතාවයේ ප්\u200dරශ් (2) කොන්ක්\u200dරීට් සහ නිර්මාණ වචන අතර වෙනස් මොකද්ද කියලා? (3) කොහොමද කොන්ක්\u200dරීට් සහ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ වචන සම්බන්ධ වචනය වෙනස් වෙන්නේ? සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ කොන්ක්\u200dරීට් වචන සහ අභ්\u200dයාසය වචන වලින් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වගේ, ඉතින් ප්\u200dරතිද', 'sv': 'Inom olika discipliner är forskare angelägna om att få insikt i empiriska drag av abstrakta vs konkreta begrepp. I detta arbete ger vi en detaljerad karakterisering av abstrakta och konkreta ords fördelning över 16 620 engelska substantiv, verb och adjektiv. Specifikt undersöker vi följande frågor: (1) Vilken är fördelningen av konkrethet i kontexten av konkreta och abstrakta målord? (2) Vilka är skillnaderna mellan konkreta och abstrakta ord när det gäller kontextuell semantisk mångfald? (3) Hur skiljer sig entropin mellan konkreta och abstrakta ordkontexter åt? Sammantaget visar våra studier konsekventa skillnader i fördelningen av konkreta och abstrakta ord, vilket utmanar existerande kognitionsteorier och ger en mer finkornig beskrivning av deras natur.', 'so': "Waxbarashada baaritaanka ayaa cilmi-baarayaashu waxay doonayaan inay waxgarasho u helaan waxyaabaha ay ku jiraan waxyaabaha ay ka mid yihiin waxyaabaha ka soo baxsada iyo fikrada concrete. Shuqulkaas, waxaynu ku siinaynaa xaraf kala duduwan dabiicadda iskudarka iyo hadalka la xiriira oo ka soo baxa 16,620 Ingiriiska noocyada, afka iyo isbedelka. Si gaar ah, waxaynu baaraynaa su'aalaha soo socda: (1) Waa maxay qaybinta hubaanka ee ku saabsan hadallada waxyaabaha la xiriiro oo aan ka gaarno? (2) Waa maxay kala duwanaanshaha ku saabsan hadallada la xiriira kala duwanaanshada xilliga? (3) Sidee baynu u kala duwanaaneysaa warqada la xiriiro oo la xiriira hadalka? Overall, our studies show consistent differences in the distributional representation of concrete and abstract words, thus challenging existing theories of cognition and providing a more fine-grained description of their nature.", 'ta': 'வடிவமைப்புகளுக்கு முன்னால் ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் விரும்புகிறார் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் 16,620 ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு மேல் வார்த்தைகள், வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் சரியான வார்த்தைகளின் பங்கீட்டு இயற்கையின குறிப்பிட்ட பின்வரும் கேள்விகளை நாம் தேடுகிறோம்: (1) குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தைகளில் குறிப்பிட்ட கூட்டு  (2) தற்போதைய குறிப்பு மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இடையே வேறுபாடு என்ன? (3) குறிப்பிட்ட நுழைவு மற்றும் வார்த்தையை வெறுப்பு பொருள் முடிவு எப்படி மாறுகிறது? மொத்தமாக, எங்கள் படிப்பாடுகள் குறிப்பு மற்றும் ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளின் பங்கீட்டு வித்தியாசமான வேறுபாடுகளை காட்டுகிறது, அதனால் நடப்பு', 'ur': 'درمیان تقسیم کے متعلق تحقیقات کرنے والوں کو آرزو کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ معلوم ہونے والی غیر معلومات کے معلومات میں نظر حاصل کریں. ہم اس کام میں 16,620 انگلیسی نام، کلمات اور اضافہ کی تقسیم کرنے والی کلمات کی تفصیل کی تعریف دیتے ہیں۔ خاص طور پر، ہم نیچے سوالوں کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں: (1) قطعیت کی تقسیم کیسی ہے قطعی باتوں کی موضوع میں؟ (2) قطعہ و غیرقابل کلمات کے درمیان اختلاف کیا ہے؟ (3) کس طرح مختلف بات کی آنٹروپی ہے؟ اور ہمارے مطالعہ ان باتوں کی تقسیم و تقسیم کی تفاوت میں ایک دوسری تفاوت دکھاتے ہیں، یہاں سے پہچان کے موجود تئوریوں کو مشکل کر رہے ہیں اور ان کی طبیعت میں بہت زیادہ دھوپ کی تعریف کررہے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Across disciplines, researchers are eager to gain insight into empirical features of abstract vs. concrete concepts.  Bu ishda, biz 16,620 ingliz tilidagi tashkilotlar, verb va adjektlarining tarqatish tarkibini taqlil qilamiz. Koʻrsatilgan, biz quyidagi savollarni boshqaramiz: (1) Koʻrsatilgan soʻzlarning soʻzlarida shaxsiyatlarni ajratish nima? (2) Koʻrinadigan semantik tarqatish darajada gapiruvchi so'zlar qanday? (3) Koncrete va obrakt so'zlarning yozuvlari qanday ajratiladi? Umumiy, bizning o'qituvchilarimiz koncrete va abstrakt so'zlarining taqdimotidagi o'zgarishni ko'rsatadi, shunday qilib, mavjud mavjud mavjud mavjud g'oyalarni aniqlash va ularning tabiiy taʼriflarini ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong các lĩnh vực, các nhà nghiên cứu rất nóng lòng tìm hiểu được các tính chất của trừu tượng và cụ thể. Trong tác phẩm này, chúng tôi cung cấp một đánh giá chi tiết về bản phân phối của những từ trừu tượng và cụ thể xuyên qua 16,610 danh từ Anh, động từ và tính từ. Cụ thể, chúng ta sẽ tìm hiểu câu hỏi: 1) Sự phân phối nào của sự thật trong các đối tượng của các từ đích cụ thể và trừu tượng? (2) Sự khác biệt giữa những từ ngữ cụ thể và trừu tượng về đa dạng ngữ văn học ngữ định? (3) Làm sao tồn tại ngẫu nhiên của các nền từ ngữ cụ thể và trừu tượng khác nhau? Những nghiên cứu của chúng tôi cho thấy sự khác nhau liên tục trong phân phối các từ cụ thể và trừu tượng, thế nên thách thức các giả thuyết nhận thức hiện tại và cung cấp một mô tả sắc thái hơn về bản chất của chúng.', 'bg': 'В различни дисциплини изследователите са нетърпеливи да получат представа за емпиричните характеристики на абстрактните срещу конкретните концепции. В тази работа предлагаме детайлна характеристика на дистрибуционния характер на абстрактните и конкретни думи в 16 620 английски съществителни, глаголи и прилагателни. По-конкретно, изследваме следните въпроси: (1) Какво е разпределението на конкретността в контекста на конкретни и абстрактни целеви думи? (2) Какви са разликите между конкретните и абстрактните думи по отношение на контекстното семантично разнообразие? (3) Как се различава ентропията на конкретни и абстрактни текстови контексти? Като цяло, нашите изследвания показват последователни разлики в разпределителното представяне на конкретни и абстрактни думи, като по този начин оспорват съществуващите теории на познанието и осигуряват по-фино описание на тяхната природа.', 'hr': 'Preko disciplina, istraživači žele dobiti uvid u empiričke karakteristike apstrakta protiv betonskih koncepta. U ovom poslu pružamo detaljnu karakteriziju distribucijske prirode apstrakta i betonskih riječi preko 16 620 engleskih imena, verba i adjektiva. Posebno istražujemo sljedeća pitanja: (2) Kakve su razlike između betonskih i apstraktnih riječi u smislu contextualne semantičke raznolikosti? (3) Kako se entropija betonskih i apstraktnih riječi razlikuje? Nakon svega, naše ispitivanje pokazuju konsekventne razlike u raspodjelnoj predstavi betonskih i apstraktnih riječi, tako izazivajući postojeće teorije kognicije i pružajući dobar opis njihove prirode.', 'da': 'På tværs af discipliner er forskere ivrige efter at få indsigt i empiriske træk af abstrakte vs. konkrete begreber. I dette arbejde giver vi en detaljeret karakterisering af den fordelingsmæssige karakter af abstrakte og konkrete ord på tværs af 16.620 engelske navneord, verber og adjektiver. Specielt undersøger vi følgende spørgsmål: (1) Hvad er fordelingen af konkretitet i sammenhænge med konkrete og abstrakte målord? (2) Hvad er forskellene mellem konkrete og abstrakte ord med hensyn til kontekstuel semantisk mangfoldighed? (3) Hvordan adskiller entropien af konkrete og abstrakte ordsammenhænge sig? Samlet set viser vores undersøgelser konsekvente forskelle i den fordelingsmæssige repræsentation af konkrete og abstrakte ord, hvilket udfordrer eksisterende teorier om kognition og giver en mere finkornet beskrivelse af deres natur.', 'nl': 'Over disciplines heen willen onderzoekers graag inzicht krijgen in empirische kenmerken van abstracte versus concrete concepten. In dit werk geven we een gedetailleerde karakterisering van het distributiekarakter van abstracte en concrete woorden over 16.620 Engelse zelfstandige naamwoorden, werkwoorden en bijvoeglijke naamwoorden. Specifiek onderzoeken we de volgende vragen: (1) Wat is de verdeling van concretheid in de contexten van concrete en abstracte doelwoorden? (2) Wat zijn de verschillen tussen concrete en abstracte woorden in termen van contextuele semantische diversiteit? (3) Hoe verschilt de entropie van concrete en abstracte woordcontexten? Over het algemeen tonen onze studies consistente verschillen aan in de distributieweergave van concrete en abstracte woorden, waardoor bestaande cognitietheorieën worden aangevochten en een meer gedetailleerde beschrijving van hun aard worden gegeven.', 'ko': '학과를 뛰어넘는 연구원들은 추상과 구체적인 개념의 경험 특징을 깊이 이해하기를 갈망한다.이 작업에서 우리는 16620개의 영어 명사, 동사와 형용사 중의 추상어와 구체어의 분포 성질을 상세하게 묘사하였다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 다음과 같은 문제를 연구했다. (1) 구체성이 구체적이고 추상적인 목표어 언어 환경에서의 분포 상황은 어떠한가?(2) 구체적인 단어와 추상적인 단어는 어경의 의미 다양성에 있어 어떤 차이가 있습니까?(3) 구체적이고 추상적인 단어 상하문의 엔트로피는 어떤 차이가 있습니까?전반적으로 말하자면 우리의 연구는 구체적이고 추상적인 단어의 분포 표징과 일치하는 차이가 존재하기 때문에 기존의 인지 이론에 도전하고 그 본질에 대한 더욱 세밀한 입도 묘사를 제공했다.', 'de': 'Fachübergreifend wollen Forscher Einblicke in empirische Merkmale abstrakter vs. konkreter Konzepte gewinnen. In dieser Arbeit geben wir eine detaillierte Charakterisierung des Verteilungscharakters abstrakter und konkreter Wörter über 16.620 englische Substantive, Verben und Adjektive. Konkret untersuchen wir folgende Fragen: (1) Wie ist die Verteilung von Konkretheit im Kontext konkreter und abstrakter Zielwörter? (2) Was sind die Unterschiede zwischen konkreten und abstrakten Wörtern hinsichtlich der kontextuellen semantischen Vielfalt? (3) Wie unterscheidet sich die Entropie von konkreten und abstrakten Wortkontexten? Insgesamt zeigen unsere Studien konsistente Unterschiede in der Verteilungsdarstellung konkreter und abstrakter Wörter, wodurch bestehende Kognitionstheorien infrage gestellt und deren Natur detaillierter beschrieben wird.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات\u200cکنندگان از طریق دیسپانیایی، امیدوارند که درباره\u200cی ویژه\u200cهای امپراطوری در مقابل مفهوم\u200cهای کنترل دریافت کنند. در این کار، ما یک تعریف جزئیات از طبیعت تقسیم کردن کلمات مطلق و قطعی را در ۱۶،۶۲۰ نام انگلیسی، کلمات و قطعی پیشنهاد می کنیم. مخصوصا، ما سوالات بعدی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم: (۱) تقسیم قطعیت در موقعیت کلمات هدف و قطعی چیست؟ (2) تفاوت بین کلمات کنترل و مطلق به عنوان متفاوت semantic متوسط چیست؟ (3) چگونه انتروپی کلمه\u200cهای مختلف است؟ در کل مطالعه\u200cهای ما تفاوت\u200cهای موجود در نمایش توزیع کلمات کنترل و مطلق را نشان می\u200cدهند، بنابراین تئوری\u200cهای موجود شناختن را مشکل می\u200cدهند و توضیح طبیعت\u200cشان را بهتر می\u200cدهند.', 'id': 'Di seluruh disiplin, peneliti bersemangat untuk mendapatkan pengetahuan tentang ciri-ciri empiris konsep abstrak vs. konkrit. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menyediakan karakterisasi terperinci dari alam distribusi kata abstrak dan konkrit melalui 16.620 nama Inggris, verb dan adjektif. Secara spesifik, kami menyelidiki pertanyaan berikut: (1) Apa distribusi konkrit dalam konteks kata-kata konkret dan abstrak sasaran? (2) Apa perbedaan antara kata-kata konkrit dan abstrak dalam terma perbedaan semantis kontekstual? (3) Bagaimana entropi dari konteks kata konkrit dan abstrak berbeda? Secara umum, penelitian kami menunjukkan perbedaan konsisten dalam persembahan distribusi dari kata-kata konkrit dan abstrak, sehingga menantang teori pengetahuan yang ada dan menyediakan deskripsi sifat mereka yang lebih baik.', 'sw': 'Kupitia maadhibu, watafiti wanatamani kupata ufahamu katika vipengele vya msisitizo na dhana za kudhibiti. Katika kazi hii, tunatoa ufafanuzi wa kina wa usambazaji wa mazingira ya kujitenga na maneno maalumu katika maeneo mengi ya Kiingereza 16,620, maneno na mabadiliko. Kwa ujumla, tunachunguza maswali yafuatayo: (1) usambazaji wa uhakika ni nini katika miradi ya maneno ya ushirika na kujitenga? (2) Je, tofauti gani kati ya maneno yenye uhakika na ya kujitenga kwa sababu ya utofauti wa sekta za kimataifa? (3) Inawezaje kuingiliwa kwa maneno yenye uhakika na kuacha maneno yanatofautiana? Kwa ujumla, tafiti zetu zinaonyesha tofauti tofauti tofauti katika uwakilizaji wa maneno yenye ushirika na ya kujitenga, kwa hiyo inachanganya nadharia zilizopo za kutambua na kutoa maelezo bora zaidi ya asili yao.', 'tr': 'Taýplinler arasynda, araştyranlar abstrakt we konkret düşünjeleriniň empirik özelliklerine düşünmek isleýärler. Bu işde, Abstrakt we Beton sözleriniň daýlamagyny 16,620 iňlis dilinde, verbleriň we adjektivleriň daýlamagyny biraz detaylar tanyşdyrýarys. Adatça, biz indiki soraglary barlaýarys: (1) konkretlik we abstrakt sözlerin daşarylyşygy näme? (2) Kontekstsel semantik çeşitlilikle ilgili konkret ve abstrakt sözler arasında farklılıklar nedir? (3) Beton ve abstrakt kelimelerin entropisi nasıl farklıdır? Toplam, araştırmalarımız beton ve abstrakt sözlerin dağıtılmasında, bu şekilde mevcut bilim teoriýalaryny çözerek ve dogrudaklarynyň biraz daha düzgün tasvir edilmesini gösterir.', 'af': "Deur dissipels, ondersoekers is onheilig om insig te kry in empiriese funksies van abstrakte teen betekene konsepte. In hierdie werk verskaf ons 'n gedetale karakterisering van die verspreiding natuur van abstrakte en betekene woorde oor 16,620 Engelske noume, verbe en adjektives. Spesifieke, ons ondersoek die volgende vrae: (1) Wat is die verspreiding van betekens in die konteks van beteken en abstrakte doelwoorde? (2) Wat is die verskil tussen beteken en abstrakte woorde in terms van contextual semantiese verskil? (3) Hoe verskillig word die entropie van beton en abstrakte woordekonteks? Ons studie vertoon in die verspreidingsverskil van beteken en abstrakte woorde, sodat die bestaande teoriee van kognisie vergelyk en 'n meer fyn-graad beskrywing van hul natuur verskaf.", 'am': 'በጥምቀት ላይ አስተማሪዎቹ የኮንክሮት አካባቢ እና የኮንክሬት አካባቢ ጥያቄዎችን ለማግኘት ይፈልጋሉ፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ 16,620 እንግሊዝኛ፣ ቃላት እና አካባቢዎች ያሉትን የአፍሪካዊ ቃላት እና የአፍሪካዊ ቃላትን እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የሚከተሉትን ጥያቄዎች እንመርምራለን:(1) በአካባቢ ቃላት ውስጥ እርግጠኛ ምን አካባቢ ነው? (2) በአሁኑ የsemantic ልዩ ልዩነት እና ቃላት መካከል ምን ልዩነት ነው? (3) የክፍለ እና የቃላት መግለጫ እንዴት ይለየዋል? በተጠቃሚ፣ ትምህርታችን በክፍለ እና በክፍለ ቃላት ማሳየት የሚተካክል ልዩነትን ያሳያል፡፡ ስለዚህም የአሁኑን ማወቅ ጥያቄ እና የፍጥረታቸውን መልዕክት አብልጦ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'AraŇütńĪrmacńĪlar, abstrakt v…ô konkrete fikirl…ôrin empirik √∂zellikl…ôrin…ô baxmaq ist…ôyirl…ôr. Bu iŇüd…ô, biz abstrakt v…ô beton s√∂zl…ôrin dańüńĪtńĪlmasńĪ t…ôbi…ôtini 16.620 ńįngiliz…ô dilind…ô, verbl…ôrin v…ô adjektivl…ôrin dańüńĪtńĪlmasńĪnńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôyirik. Bel…ôlikl…ô, biz bu suallarńĪ araŇüdńĪrńĪrńĪq: (1) konkretlik v…ô abstrakt s√∂zl…ôrin m√ľxt…ôlifliyi n…ôdir? (2) Konqit v…ô abstrakt s√∂zl…ôrin m√ľxt…ôlif semantik m√ľxt…ôlif m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr bar…ôsind…ôki f…ôrql…ôr n…ôdir? (3) Ketin v…ô abstrakt s√∂zl…ôrin entropisi nec…ô f…ôrqli olar? H…ôqiq…ôt…ôn, araŇütńĪrmalarńĪmńĪz beton v…ô abstraktlńĪ s√∂zl…ôrin dańüńĪtńĪlmasńĪnda m√ľxt…ôlif f…ôrql…ôr…ô g√∂st…ôrir, bu s…ôb…ôbd…ô h…ômiŇü…ôlik tanńĪdńĪqlarńĪn teoriyalarńĪnńĪ √ß…ôtinlikl…ôyir v…ô onlarńĪn t…ôbi…ôtinin daha yaxŇüńĪ t…ôrzl…ôrini t…ôsdiql…ôyir.', 'hy': 'Հետազոտողները ցանկանում են հասկանալ վերացական և կոնկրետ գաղափարների էմպրիկական հատկանիշները: Այս աշխատանքում մենք տրամադրում ենք վերացական և կոնկրետ բառերի բաշխման մանրամասն բնորոշություն 16,620 անգլերեն բայերի, բայերի և բայերի միջև: Իրականում, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք հետևյալ հարցերը: (1) Ի՞նչ է կոնկրետության տարածումը կոնտեքստի և վերացական նպատակային բառերի կոնտեքստում: (2) Ինչպիսի՞ն են տարբերությունները կոնտեքստոնալ սեմանտիկ բազմազանության առումով կոնտեքստոնալ և վերացական բառերի միջև: (3) Ինչպե՞ս տարբերվում է կոնտեկտիկ և վերացական բառերի կոնտեքստների էնտրոպիան: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, մեր ուսումնասիրությունները ցույց են տալիս կոնկրետ և վերացական բառերի բաժանման տարբերությունները, ինչը մարտահրավեր է տալիս գիտակցության գոյություն ունեցող տեսություններին և նրանց բնույթի ավելի գեղեցիկ նկարագրությունը:', 'bn': 'শিক্ষার্থীদের পাশে গবেষকরা চেয়েছেন যারা এক্সপ্রেক্ট বিরোধী ধারণা বিরুদ্ধে সামরিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদা In this work, we provide a detailed characterisation of the distributional nature of abstract and concrete words across 16,620 English nouns, verbs and adjectives.  বিশেষ করে, আমরা নিম্নলিখিত প্রশ্নের তদন্ত করি: (১) কোন নির্দিষ্ট বিশেষ বিভিন্ন শব্দের বিতরণ কি? (2) প্রতিযোগিতায় সেম্পেন্টিক বৈচিত্র্যের মাধ্যমে কন্ক্রিট এবং এক্সপ্রেট শব্দের মধ্যে পার্থক্য কি? (3) কনস্ক্রিটের এন্ট্রোপি এবং শব্দের প্রতিযোগিতা কিভাবে ভিন্ন? সাধারণত, আমাদের গবেষণাগুলো তাদের প্রকৃতির বিতরণের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন পার্থক্য দেখাচ্ছে।', 'bs': 'Kroz discipline, istraživači žele da dobiju uvid u empiričke karakteristike apstrakta protiv betonskih koncepta. U ovom poslu pružamo detaljnu karakterizaciju distribucijske prirode apstrakta i betonskih riječi preko 16.620 engleskih imena, verba i adjektiva. Posebno istražujemo sljedeća pitanja: (2) Kakve su razlike između betona i apstrakta riječi u smislu kontekstualne semantičke raznolikosti? (3) Kako se entropija betonskih i abstraktivnih riječi razlikuje? Naše studije pokazuju konsekventne razlike u raspodjelnoj predstavi betonskih i apstraktnih riječi, tako izazivajući postojeće teorije kognicije i pružajući detaljniji opis njihove prirode.', 'ca': "A través de les disciplines, els investigadors estan ansiosos per adquirir una visió sobre les característiques empíriques dels conceptes abstracts i concrets. In this work, we provide a detailed characterisation of the distributional nature of abstract and concrete words across 16,620 English nouns, verbs and adjectives.  Concretament, investigam les següents preguntes: (1) Quina és la distribució de la concretetat en els contextes de paraules objectives concretes i abstractes? (2) Quines són les diferències entre paraules concretes i abstractes en termes de diversitat semàntica contextual? (3) Com difereix l'entropia dels contextes de paraules concrets i abstractes? En general, els nostres estudis mostren diferències consistents en la representació distribucional de paraules concretes i abstractes, desafiant així les teories existents de la cognitió i proporcionant una descripció més fina de la seva naturalesa.", 'cs': 'Napříč disciplínami se výzkumníci snaží získat vhled do empirických rysů abstraktních versus konkrétních konceptů. V této práci podáváme detailní charakterizaci distribuční povahy abstraktních a konkrétních slov napříč 16,620 anglickými podstatnými jmény, slovesami a přídavnými jmény. Konkrétně zkoumáme následující otázky: (1) Jaké je rozdělení konkrétnosti v kontextu konkrétních a abstraktních cílových slov? (2) Jaké jsou rozdíly mezi konkrétními a abstraktními slovy z hlediska kontextové sémantické diverzity? (3) Jak se liší entropie konkrétních a abstraktních slovních kontextů? Celkově naše studie ukazují konzistentní rozdíly v distribuční reprezentaci konkrétních a abstraktních slov, čímž zpochybňují existující teorie poznání a poskytují jemnější popis jejich povahy.', 'et': 'Teadlased soovivad igal erialal saada ülevaadet abstraktsete ja konkreetsete kontseptsioonide empiirilistest omadustest. Selles töös kirjeldame üksikasjalikult abstraktsete ja konkreetsete sõnade jaotust 16 620 inglise nimisõna, tegusõna ja omadussõna vahel. Konkreetselt uurime järgmisi küsimusi: (1) Milline on konkreetsete ja abstraktsete sihtsõnade kontekstis konkreetse konkreetse ja abstraktse sisu jaotumine? (2) Millised on konkreetsete ja abstraktsete sõnade erinevused kontekstilise semantilise mitmekesisuse seisukohalt? (3) Kuidas erineb konkreetsete ja abstraktsete sõnade kontekstide entroopia? Üldiselt näitavad meie uuringud järjepidevaid erinevusi konkreetsete ja abstraktsete sõnade jaotuslikus esituses, seades seega välja olemasolevad kognitsiooni teooriad ja pakkudes nende olemuse täpsemat kirjeldust.', 'fi': 'Tutkijat ovat innokkaita saamaan tietoa abstraktien ja konkreettisten käsitteiden empiirisistä piirteistä eri tieteenaloilla. Tässä työssä kuvataan yksityiskohtaisesti abstraktien ja konkreettisten sanojen jakautumista 16 620 englanninkielisen substantiivin, verbin ja adjektiivin välillä. Tutkimme erityisesti seuraavia kysymyksiä: (1) Mikä on konkreettisuuden jakautuminen konkreettisten ja abstraktien kohdesanojen kontekstissa? (2) Mitkä ovat konkreettisten ja abstraktien sanojen väliset erot kontekstuaalisen semanttisen monimuotoisuuden kannalta? (3) Miten konkreettisten ja abstraktien sanakontekstien entropia eroaa toisistaan? Kaiken kaikkiaan tutkimuksemme osoittavat johdonmukaisia eroja konkreettisten ja abstraktien sanojen jakautumisessa, mikä haastaa olemassa olevia kognitioteorioita ja antaa tarkemman kuvauksen niiden luonteesta.', 'sq': 'Ndërmjet disiplinave, kërkuesit janë të gatshëm të fitojnë kuptim në karakteristikat empirike të koncepteve abstrakte vs. konkrete. Në këtë punë, ne ofrojmë një karakterizatë të hollësishme të natyrës shpërndarëse të fjalëve abstrakte dhe konkrete nëpër 16,620 emra angleze, verbe dhe adjektive. Veçanërisht, ne hetojmë pyetjet e ardhshme: (1) Cili është shpërndarja e konkretitetit në kontekstet e fjalëve konkrete dhe abstrakte të objektivit? (2) Cilat janë dallimet midis fjalëve konkrete dhe abstrakte në lidhje me diversitetin semantik kontekstual? (3) Si ndryshon entropia e konteksteve të fjalëve konkrete dhe abstrakte? Në përgjithësi, studimet tona tregojnë dallime konsistente në përfaqësimin shpërndarës të fjalëve konkrete dhe abstrakte, duke sfiduar kështu teoritë ekzistuese të njohjes dhe duke ofruar një përshkrim më të hollë të natyrës së tyre.', 'jv': 'Daerah sing disiplin, bahsa nambarang kedokan luwih nggawe isih luwih-luwih dumadhi kaé karo perbudhakan karo perusahaan kelas. Nang trabah iki, kita enyeste perusahaan kelas-kelas ning rakyat diubutuhan karo alwat lan kelas-kelas ning 16,6 1) (2) Ngubah opo sing mengko cah-cah saben karo kelas nang sampek lan soko soko semantar sampek ? (3) lah Diwong-wong, akeh arèh-wong kuwi gambar kelas nang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan gambar lan kelas traktur, lan ngono kuwi nggawe theori sing isih turang awak dhéwé lan ujaran diolah sing paling dhéwé.', 'ha': 'Ko cikin disiplin, watani na son su sami gane ta cikin wasu misãlai na kanzuta ta kanzu-koncrete. Daga wannan aikin, za mu ƙayyade wani fassara na rabo masu tsari na tsaro da kalmõmi bakin Ingiriya na 16650, salofi da sauri. Ina ƙayyade, Munã tambayar su masu jẽre: (1) Mẽne ne rabon da tabbatarwa a cikin muhimman kalmõmi da ke kanana? Mẽne ne gaɓancin a tsakanin kofi da bakwai da wasu kalmõmi da ke cikin bakwai? (3) Yãya ne entropy na concrete da kuɓutar da magana masu gaura? Haƙĩƙa, ardayanmu suna nuna diffaniki a cikin rabon maganar concrete da kuɓuta, sabõda haka sunã tsõratar da littafan da ke gaba a yanzu masu sanki da kuma yana samar da taƙaita mafi kyakkyawan fassara.', 'he': 'מעבר למשפטים, חוקרים מעוניינים להשיג הבנה לתחומים אמפיריים של מושג אסטרקטי נגד מובן. בעבודה הזו, אנו מספקים תיאור פרטי של טבע ההפצה של מילים אקסטרקטיות ובטונות ברחבי 16,620 שמות אנגליות, אלברים ואדסיקטיבים. במיוחד, אנו חוקרים את השאלות הבאות: (1) מהי ההפצה של תוצרות בתוך הקשר של מילים מטרה בטונות ואסטרקטיות? (2) מה ההבדלים בין מילים קבוצות למילים אסטרקטיות במונחים של מגוון סמנטי קונטקסטי? (3) איך האנטרופיה של הקשר המילים הבטון והאקסטרקט שונה? באופן כללי, המחקרים שלנו מראים הבדלים קבועים ביציגת ההפצה של מילים מבטונות ואסטרקטיות, כך מאתגרים תיאוריות הקיומות של קוגניציה ומספקים תיאור מוצק יותר של טבעם.', 'sk': 'Raziskovalci si po vseh disciplinah želijo pridobiti vpogled v empirične značilnosti abstraktnih in konkretnih konceptov. V tem delu smo podrobno opisali distribucijsko naravo abstraktnih in konkretnih besed v 16.620 angleških samostalnikih, glagolih in pridevnikih. Natančneje raziskujemo naslednja vprašanja: (1) Kakšna je porazdelitev konkretnosti v kontekstu konkretnih in abstraktnih ciljnih besed? (2) Kakšne so razlike med konkretnimi in abstraktnimi besedami v smislu kontekstne semantične raznolikosti? (3) Kako se entropija konkretnih in abstraktnih besednih kontekstov razlikuje? Na splošno naše študije kažejo dosledne razlike v distribucijski reprezentaciji konkretnih in abstraktnih besed, s čimer izpodbijajo obstoječe teorije kognicije in zagotavljajo bolj natančen opis njihove narave.', 'bo': 'མགོ་སྐབས་བསྐྲུན་དང་། ཚགས་མ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྦྱར་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་གྲངས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་ཕན་ཚུན་དང་། དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་རྗེས་ཐོག་དང་། བྱ་ཚིག་དང་ཁོས་ཐོག་ཚིའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གསལ་བཤད་ཆོས་ དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་གཤམ་གྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་དག་བརྟན་ཞིབ་བྱེད། (2) ཚོར་རྣམ་པ་དང་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གང་འདྲ་ཡིན་ནམ། (3) དབྱིབས་ཚུལ་དང་ཐུག་སྒྲིལ་གྱི་ཚིག་རྣམས་ལ་ཇི་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན་ནམ། འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཚོའི་རྣམ་པ་ཁག་དང་གསལ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་ཡོད་པ་སྟོན།'}
{'en': 'The Limitations of Cross-language Word Embeddings Evaluation', 'ar': 'قيود تقييم تضمين الكلمات عبر اللغات', 'fr': "Les limites de l'évaluation de l'intégration de mots dans plusieurs langues", 'es': 'Las limitaciones de la evaluación de incrustaciones de palabras en varios idiomas', 'pt': 'As limitações da avaliação de incorporação de palavras em vários idiomas', 'ja': '言語間の単語埋め込み評価の限界', 'zh': '跨语言词嵌评估局限性', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषा Word एम्बेडिंग मूल्यांकन की सीमाएँ', 'ru': 'Ограничения оценки кросс-язычных вложений слов', 'ga': 'Na Teorainneacha a bhaineann le Meastóireacht ar Leabú Focal Trastheanga', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű szóbeágyazások értékelésének korlátai', 'it': 'I limiti della valutazione delle incorporazioni di parole cross-language', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbinio žodžių įterpimo vertinimo apribojimai', 'el': 'Οι περιορισμοί της γλωσσικής ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων Αξιολόγηση', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Қосымша тілді сөздерді ендіру шектеулері', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്സ്- ഭാഷ വാക്കുകളുടെ പരിധികള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Pembatasan Pemindahan Perkataan Selata-bahasa', 'mk': 'Ограничувањата на меѓујазичното вградување на зборови', 'mt': 'Il-Limitazzjonijiet tal-Evalwazzjoni tal-Inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem bejn il-lingwi', 'mn': 'Дөрвөн хэл хэлний нэгтгэлийн хязгаарлалт', 'no': 'Grensesningar for å evaluera krysspråk- ordinnbygging', 'ro': 'Limitele evaluării încorporărilor de cuvinte interlingvistice', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'The Limitations of Cross-language Word Embeddings Evaluation', 'pl': 'Ograniczenia oceny wielojęzycznych osadzeń słowa', 'sv': 'Begränsningarna för utvärdering av Word-inbäddningar över flera språk', 'sr': 'Ограница од оценке крозезичних речи', 'ta': 'கிருஸ்மொழி வார்த்தையின் வரம்புகள்', 'ur': 'Cross-language Word Embedding Evaluation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giới hạn của giá trị ngôn ngữ chữ thập', 'bg': 'Ограниченията на оценката на междуезичните вграждания на думи', 'da': 'Begrænsningerne ved evaluering af indlejringer på tværs af sprog', 'nl': 'De beperkingen van Cross-Language Word Embeddings Evaluatie', 'de': 'Die Grenzen von sprachübergreifenden Word Embeddings Bewertung', 'id': 'Pembatasan Evaluasi Pencampuran Perkataan Selata Bahasa', 'hr': 'ograničenja procjene uključenja riječi preko jezika', 'ko': '다중 언어 단어 삽입 평가의 한계성', 'fa': 'محدودیت ارزیابی کلمه\u200cهای عبارت زبانی', 'sw': 'Limito ya Uthibitisho wa Sauti za Kirusi', 'sq': 'Limitimet e vlerësimit të përfshirjes së fjalëve ndërgjuhëse', 'tr': 'Çapraz dili içindeki söz ilatynyň çykyşlyklar', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቃላት አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'The Limitations of Cross-language Word Embeddings Evaluation', 'ca': "Les limitacions de l'Evaluació de l'incorporació de paraules en llenguatges transversals", 'az': '칂톛rpdil S칬zl톛rin 캻fad톛l톛rinin Q캼ymetl톛ri', 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষার শব্দের এমবেডিং পরিমাণের সীমাবদ্ধ', 'cs': 'Omezení vkládání slov mezi jazyky', 'bs': 'Ograničenja procjene uključenja krstojezičkih riječi', 'et': 'Keeleüleste sõnade manustamise hindamise piirangud', 'fi': 'Kieltenvälisten sanaupotusten arvioinnin rajoitukset', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'ההגבלות של הערכה של פיצוי מילים בשפה', 'sk': 'Omejitve vrednotenja medjezikovnih vdelav besed', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Cross-language ཡི་གེ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་འཛུལ་སྟངས་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱེད་པའི་ཚད།'}
{'en': 'The aim of this work is to explore the possible limitations of existing methods of cross-language word embeddings evaluation, addressing the lack of correlation between intrinsic and extrinsic cross-language evaluation methods. To prove this hypothesis, we construct English-Russian datasets for extrinsic and intrinsic evaluation tasks and compare performances of 5 different cross-language models on them. The results say that the scores even on different intrinsic benchmarks do not correlate to each other. We can conclude that the use of human references as ground truth for cross-language word embeddings is not proper unless one does not understand how do native speakers process semantics in their cognition.', 'ar': 'الهدف من هذا العمل هو استكشاف القيود المحتملة للطرق الحالية لتقييم حفلات الزفاف عبر اللغات ، ومعالجة الافتقار إلى الارتباط بين طرق التقييم عبر اللغات الداخلية والخارجية. لإثبات هذه الفرضية ، نقوم ببناء مجموعات بيانات إنجليزية-روسية لمهام التقييم الخارجية والجوهرية ومقارنة أداء 5 نماذج مختلفة عبر اللغات عليها. تشير النتائج إلى أن الدرجات حتى على المعايير الجوهرية المختلفة لا ترتبط ببعضها البعض. يمكننا أن نستنتج أن استخدام المراجع البشرية كحقيقة أساسية لتزيين الكلمات عبر اللغات ليس مناسبًا ما لم يكن المرء لا يفهم كيف يعالج المتحدثون الأصليون الدلالات في إدراكهم.', 'pt': 'O objetivo deste trabalho é explorar as possíveis limitações dos métodos existentes de avaliação cross-language embeddings de palavras, abordando a falta de correlação entre os métodos intrínsecos e extrínsecos de avaliação cross-language. Para provar essa hipótese, construímos conjuntos de dados inglês-russo para tarefas de avaliação extrínseca e intrínseca e comparamos o desempenho de 5 modelos diferentes de idiomas diferentes. Os resultados dizem que as pontuações, mesmo em diferentes benchmarks intrínsecos, não se correlacionam entre si. Podemos concluir que o uso de referências humanas como verdade básica para embeddings de palavras entre línguas não é apropriado, a menos que não se entenda como os falantes nativos processam a semântica em sua cognição.', 'ja': '本研究の目的は、言語間埋め込み評価の既存の手法の可能性のある限界を探ることであり、本質的な言語間の評価手法と外因的な言語間の評価手法の間の相関の欠如に対処することである。この仮説を証明するために、私たちは外因的および内因的評価タスクのための英語-ロシア語データセットを構築し、5つの異なるクロスランゲージモデルのパフォーマンスを比較します。結果は、異なる固有のベンチマークであってもスコアが互いに相関しないことを示しています。私たちは、言語間の単語埋め込みのための基礎的真理としての人間の参照の使用は、ネイティブスピーカーが認知における意味論をどのように処理するかを理解しない限り、適切ではないと結論づけることができます。', 'fr': "L'objectif de ce travail est d'explorer les limites possibles des méthodes existantes d'évaluation des intégrations de mots interlangues, en s'attaquant au manque de corrélation entre les méthodes d'évaluation interlangues intrinsèques et extrinsèques. Pour prouver cette hypothèse, nous construisons des ensembles de données anglais-russe pour des tâches d'évaluation extrinsèques et intrinsèques et comparons les performances de 5 modèles interlinguistiques différents sur ces derniers. Les résultats indiquent que les scores, même sur différents repères intrinsèques, ne sont pas corrélés les uns aux autres. Nous pouvons conclure que l'utilisation de références humaines comme vérité de base pour l'intégration de mots interlinguistiques n'est pas appropriée sauf si l'on ne comprend pas comment les locuteurs natifs traitent la sémantique dans leur cognition.", 'hi': 'इस काम का उद्देश्य क्रॉस-लैंग्वेज शब्द एम्बेडिंग मूल्यांकन के मौजूदा तरीकों की संभावित सीमाओं का पता लगाना है, जो आंतरिक और बाह्य क्रॉस-लैंग्वेज मूल्यांकन विधियों के बीच सहसंबंध की कमी को संबोधित करता है। इस परिकल्पना को साबित करने के लिए, हम बाहरी और आंतरिक मूल्यांकन कार्यों के लिए अंग्रेजी-रूसी डेटासेट का निर्माण करते हैं और उन पर 5 अलग-अलग क्रॉस-लैंग्वेज मॉडल के प्रदर्शन की तुलना करते हैं। परिणामों का कहना है कि विभिन्न आंतरिक बेंचमार्क पर भी स्कोर एक-दूसरे से संबंधित नहीं हैं। हम यह निष्कर्ष निकाल सकते हैं कि क्रॉस-लैंग्वेज शब्द एम्बेडिंग के लिए जमीनी सच्चाई के रूप में मानव संदर्भों का उपयोग उचित नहीं है जब तक कि कोई यह नहीं समझता कि देशी वक्ताओं को उनकी अनुभूति में शब्दार्थ कैसे संसाधित किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Цель этой работы заключается в изучении возможных ограничений существующих методов оценки вложений слов на разных языках, устраняя отсутствие корреляции между внутренними и внешними методами оценки на разных языках. Чтобы доказать эту гипотезу, мы строим английско-российские наборы данных для внешних и внутренних задач оценки и сравниваем производительность 5 различных межъязыковых моделей на них. Результаты говорят о том, что оценки даже по различным внутренним критериям не коррелируют друг с другом. Мы можем заключить, что использование человеческих ссылок в качестве основной истины для вложений кросс-языковых слов не является правильным, если только не понять, как носители языка обрабатывают семантику в своем познании.', 'zh': '所以探见跨语言词嵌评之法可局限性,内与外语评法之间无相关性也。 为证此设,为外与内评事构英语 - 俄语数据集,较5种不同跨语模样之性。 结果表明异内基准,得分不相及。 吾辈可得而论也,用人引用为跨语言词嵌入之本理非当,非人不知母语人士处语义在其知中。', 'es': 'El objetivo de este trabajo es explorar las posibles limitaciones de los métodos existentes de evaluación de incrustaciones de palabras en varios idiomas, abordando la falta de correlación entre los métodos de evaluación intrínsecos y extrínsecos entre idiomas. Para probar esta hipótesis, construimos conjuntos de datos inglés-ruso para tareas de evaluación extrínsecas e intrínsecas y comparamos los rendimientos de 5 modelos diferentes de idiomas diferentes en ellos. Los resultados indican que las puntuaciones, incluso en diferentes puntos de referencia intrínsecos, no se correlacionan entre sí. Podemos concluir que el uso de referencias humanas como verdad fundamental para la incrustación de palabras en varios idiomas no es adecuado a menos que uno no comprenda cómo los hablantes nativos procesan la semántica en su cognición.', 'ga': 'Is é aidhm na hoibre seo iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar na srianta a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ar mhodhanna reatha meastóireachta ar leabú focal trasteanga, ag tabhairt aghaidh ar an easpa comhghaolmhaireachta idir modhanna meastóireachta trasteangacha intreacha agus eistreacha. Chun an hipitéis seo a chruthú, tógaimid tacair sonraí Béarla-Rúisis do thascanna meastóireachta intreacha agus intreacha agus déanaimid comparáid idir feidhmíochtaí de 5 mhúnla tras-teanga éagsúla orthu. Deir na torthaí nach bhfuil comhghaol idir na scóir fiú ar thagarmharcanna intreacha éagsúla lena chéile. Is féidir linn a thabhairt ar an gconclúid nach bhfuil sé ceart tagairtí daonna a úsáid mar fhírinne talún le haghaidh leabú focal tras-teanga mura dtuigeann duine conas a phróiseálann cainteoirí dúchais séimeantaice ina gcuid cognaíocha.', 'hu': 'A munka célja, hogy feltárja a nyelvközi szóbeágyazások értékelésének már meglévő módszereinek lehetséges korlátait, kezelve a belső és külső nyelvközi értékelési módszerek közötti korreláció hiányát. Ennek a hipotézisnek a bizonyítására angol-orosz adathalmazokat készítünk külső és intrinsec értékelési feladatokhoz, és összehasonlítjuk azokon 5 különböző, keresztnyelvű modell teljesítményét. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a pontszámok még a különböző intrinsec referenciaértékeken sem korrelálnak egymással. Arra a következtetésre juthatunk, hogy az emberi hivatkozások alapvető igazságként való használata a keresztnyelvű szóbeágyazásokhoz nem helyénvaló, hacsak nem értjük, hogy az anyanyelvűek hogyan dolgozzák fel a szemantikát a megismerésükben.', 'it': "L'obiettivo di questo lavoro è quello di esplorare le possibili limitazioni dei metodi esistenti di valutazione cross-language word embeddings, affrontando la mancanza di correlazione tra metodi intrinseci ed estrinseci di valutazione cross-language. Per dimostrare questa ipotesi, costruiamo dataset inglese-russo per compiti di valutazione estrinseca ed intrinseca e confrontiamo le prestazioni di 5 diversi modelli cross-language su di essi. I risultati dicono che i punteggi anche su diversi benchmark intrinseci non sono correlati tra loro. Possiamo concludere che l'uso dei riferimenti umani come verità di base per incorporazioni di parole cross-language non è appropriato a meno che non si capisca come i parlanti nativi elaborano la semantica nella loro cognizione.", 'lt': 'Šio darbo tikslas – išnagrinėti galimus esamų tarpkalbinio žodžių įtraukimo vertinimo metodų apribojimus ir spręsti tarpkalbinio vertinimo metodų koreliacijos trūkumą. Kad įrodytume šią hipotezę, sukuriame anglų ir rusų duomenų rinkinius išoriniams ir vidiniams vertinimo uždaviniams atlikti ir lyginame 5 skirtingų tarpkalbinių modelių rezultatus. Rezultatai rodo, kad rezultatai net pagal skirtingus vidinius lyginamuosius rodiklius nesuderinami. Galime daryti išvadą, kad žmogiškųjų nuorodų naudojimas kaip pagrindinė tiesa tarpkalbiniams žodžių įtraukimams nėra tinkamas, išskyrus atvejus, kai nesuprantama, kaip gimtųjų kalbėtojų semantika apdorojama jų pažinimo srityje.', 'el': 'Στόχος της παρούσας εργασίας είναι η διερεύνηση των πιθανών περιορισμών των υφιστάμενων μεθόδων αξιολόγησης της γλωσσικής ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, αντιμετωπίζοντας την έλλειψη συσχέτισης μεταξύ εσωτερικών και εξωγλωσσικών μεθόδων αξιολόγησης. Για να αποδειχθεί αυτή η υπόθεση, κατασκευάζουμε αγγλορωσικά σύνολα δεδομένων για εξωτερικές και εγγενείς εργασίες αξιολόγησης και συγκρίνουμε τις επιδόσεις πέντε διαφορετικών γλωσσικών μοντέλων σε αυτά. Τα αποτελέσματα λένε ότι οι βαθμολογίες ακόμη και σε διαφορετικά εγγενή κριτήρια αναφοράς δεν συσχετίζονται μεταξύ τους. Μπορούμε να συμπεράνουμε ότι η χρήση των ανθρώπινων αναφορών ως βασικής αλήθειας για την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων μεταξύ γλωσσών δεν είναι σωστή εκτός αν κάποιος δεν κατανοεί πώς επεξεργάζονται οι φυσικοί ομιλητές τη σημασιολογία στη γνώση τους.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოს მიზეზი არის გავაკეთოთ შესაძლებელი განზემილებების შესაძლებელი განზემილებები მრავალური სიტყვების განზემილების შესახებ, რომელსაც კორელაციის არსებობა ინტერენსური და ექსტრინსური მრავა ამ ჰიპოტეზეზის გამოწმება, ჩვენ ინგლისური-პერსური მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას გავაკეთებთ ექსტრინციური და ინტერენციური გავაკეთებებისთვის და 5 განსხვავებული მრავალური მო წარმოდგენები ამბობენ, რომ წარმოდგენები განსხვავებული ინტერნექტიური ბენქმერი ერთმანეთისთვის არ კორელექციენ. ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ, რომ ადამიანის რეფერენციების გამოყენება როგორც საფუძო სიმართლეში სიტყვებისთვის სიტყვებისთვის არ არის სწორია, თუმცა ადამიანი არ პასუხს როგ', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмысының мақсаты - тілдерді бірнеше тілдерді ендіру әдістерінің шектеулерін зерттеу, ішкі тілдерді бірнеше тілдерді оқу әдістерінің арасындағы қатынасыздығын шектеу. Бұл гипотезаны тексеру үшін біз ағылшын-руссиялық деректер жинақтарын сыртқы және сыртқы оқу тапсырмаларын құрып, олардың 5 әртүрлі тіл үлгілерін салыстырамыз. Нәтижелер бір-біріне сәйкес келмейді дейді. Біз адамдардың сілтемелерін бірнеше тіл сөздерді ендіру үшін негізгі шындық ретінде қолдануға дұрыс емес деп ойлаймыз, егер бір адамдардың білімінде семантикалық процессін түсінбейді.', 'mt': 'L-għan ta’ dan ix-xogħol huwa li jiġu esplorati l-limitazzjonijiet possibbli tal-metodi eżistenti ta’ evalwazzjoni tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem bejn il-lingwi, li jindirizzaw in-nuqqas ta’ korrelazzjoni bejn il-metodi intrinsiċi u esterni ta’ evalwazzjoni bejn il-lingwi. Biex nippruvaw din l-ipoteżi, nibnu settijiet ta’ dejta Ingliż-Russu għal kompiti ta’ evalwazzjoni esterni u intrinsiċi u nqabblu l-prestazzjonijiet ta’ ħames mudelli interlingwistiċi differenti fuqhom. Ir-riżultati jgħidu li l-punteġġi anki fuq punti ta’ riferiment intrinsiċi differenti ma jikkorrellawx ma’ xulxin. Jistgħu nikkonkludu li l-użu tar-referenzi umani bħala verità tal-bażi għall-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem bejn il-lingwi mhuwiex xieraq sakemm wieħed ma jifhimx kif il-kelliema nattivi jipproċessaw is-semantika fil-konoxximent tagħhom.', 'ml': 'ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം നിലവിലുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത്, ക്രിസ്റ്റ് ഭാഷയുടെ വാക്കിന്റെ മുന്നിലുള്ള പരിധികള്\u200d, അകത്തുള്ള ഉള ഈ ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റീസിനെ തെളിയിക്കാന്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-റഷ്യന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റേറ്റുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അകത്തുള്ള വിലാസങ് അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമുക്ക് തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഉപയോഗം ഭൂമിയിലെ സത്യം എന്നാണ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ക്രിസ്റ്റ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് വരുന്നത', 'mk': 'Целта на оваа работа е да ги истражува можните ограничувања на постоечките методи на проценка на меѓујазичните зборови, решавајќи го недостатокот на корелација помеѓу внатрешните и екстринзичните меѓујазични методи на проценка. За да ја докажеме оваа хипотеза, конструираме англиско-руски податоци за надворешни и внатрешни задачи за проценка и да ги споредиме изведувањата на 5 различни крстојазични модели на нив. Резултатите велат дека резултатите дури и на различни внатрешни benchmarks не се корелираат меѓусебно. Можеме да заклучиме дека употребата на човечките референции како основна вистина за меѓујазични зборови вложување не е соодветна освен ако не се разбира како домородните говорници процесираат семантика во нивното когнитивно.', 'ms': 'Tujuan kerja ini adalah untuk mengeksplorasi keterangan-keterangan kemungkinan kaedah eksistensi penilaian penyambungan perkataan salib bahasa, mengatasi kekurangan korelasi antara kaedah penilaian salib bahasa dalaman dan luar. Untuk membuktikan hipotesis ini, kami membina set data bahasa Inggeris-Rusia untuk tugas penilaian luar dan dalaman dan membandingkan prestasi 5 model salib berbeza pada mereka. Hasilnya mengatakan bahawa skor walaupun pada tanda referensi intrinsik berbeza tidak berkorrelasi antara satu sama lain. Kita boleh kesimpulkan bahawa penggunaan rujukan manusia sebagai kebenaran tanah untuk penyampaian perkataan salib bahasa tidak sesuai kecuali seseorang tidak faham bagaimana pembicara asli memproses semantik dalam pengetahuan mereka.', 'ro': 'Scopul acestei lucrări este de a explora posibilele limitări ale metodelor existente de evaluare a încorporărilor de cuvinte între limbi străine, abordând lipsa de corelație între metodele intrinsece și extrinsice de evaluare între limbi străine. Pentru a dovedi această ipoteză, construim seturi de date engleză-rusă pentru sarcini de evaluare extrinsică și intrinsecă și comparăm performanțele a 5 modele translingvistice diferite pe acestea. Rezultatele spun că scorurile chiar și pe diferite criterii intrinsece de referință nu se corelează între ele. Putem concluziona că utilizarea referințelor umane ca adevăr de bază pentru încorporarea cuvintelor între limbi nu este adecvată decât dacă nu înțelegem cum procesează vorbitorii nativi semantica în cunoașterea lor.', 'sr': 'Cilj ovog rada je istraživanje mogućih ograničenja postojećih metoda procjene međujezičkih rečenica, uključujući nedostatak korelacije između metoda procjene unutrašnjih i ekstriničkih međujezika. Da bismo dokazali ovu hipotezu, izgradili smo engleske-ruske podatke za izvanzemaljske i unutrašnje procjene zadataka i usporedili izvedbe od 5 različitih cross-language modela na njima. Rezultati kažu da rezultati čak i na različitim uvjetnim kriterijama se ne odnose međusobno. Možemo zaključiti da korištenje ljudskih referencija kao temeljna istina za uključenje jezika riječi nije odgovarajuće, osim ako ne razume kako rodni govornici procesiraju semantike u njihovom kogniciji.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын гол зорилго нь олон хэл хэлний нэмэгдүүлэх арга барилгыг судалж, интринзийн болон гадаад хэлний нэмэгдүүлэх арга барилгын хоорондын хоорондоо холбоотой байхгүй байх боломжтой хязгаарыг судалж байна. Үүнийг баталгаад бид Англи-Орос өгөгдлийн сангуудыг гадна, дотоод дүгнэлтийн даалгаврыг бүтээж, тэдний дээр 5 өөр олон хэл загварын даалгаврыг харьцуулдаг. Үүний үр дүнд өөр өөр дотоод харилцааны тоог хоорондоо холбоотой гэдгийг хэлж байна. Бид хүн төрөлхтний тэмдэглээний хэрэглээ олон хэл хэлний жинхэнээс хэрэглэх нь зөв биш гэдгийг төсөөлж болно.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අලක්ෂා තමයි ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් විශ්වාස කරනවා වගේ සීමාව අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න, බිදි මේ හිතාව සාක්ෂා කරන්න, අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය-රුසියානු දත්ත සෙට් සිද්ධ කරනවා එළියාන්තික විශිෂ්ට විශිෂ්ට විශිෂ්ට ව ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත අපිට පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න, මිනිස්සු සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විදියට ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විදියට ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විදිය', 'no': 'Målet på denne arbeiden er å utforske dei moglege grensene på eksisterande metodane for å evaluera krysspråk- ordinnbygging, og å handtera manglende korrelasjon mellom interne og ekstrinske krysspråk- evalueringsmetodar. For å bevise denne hipotesen, konstruerer vi engelsk-russisk datasett for ekstrinske og intrinsiske evalueringsoppgåver og samanliknar utføringar av 5 ulike krysspråk-modeller på dei. Resultatet seier at poeng sjølv på ulike interne benchmarker ikkje korrelatert med kvarandre. Vi kan avslutte at bruken av menneske referanser som bakgrunnsannhet for krysspråk- ordinnbygging er ikkje rett dersom ein ikkje forstår korleis den naturspråkaren handterar semantikk i kjenninga sine.', 'pl': 'Celem niniejszej pracy jest zbadanie możliwych ograniczeń istniejących metod oceny osadzeń słowa między językiem wewnętrznym i zewnętrznym. Aby udowodnić tę hipotezę, konstruujemy angielsko-rosyjskie zbiory danych dla zadań oceny zewnętrznej i wewnętrznej oraz porównujemy wyniki pięciu różnych modeli między językami. Wyniki wskazują, że wyniki nawet na różnych wewnętrznych wskaźnikach referencyjnych nie korelują ze sobą. Możemy stwierdzić, że użycie ludzkich odniesień jako podstawowej prawdy dla osadzeń słów między językami nie jest właściwe, chyba że nie rozumie się, jak native speakers przetwarzają semantykę w swoim poznaniu.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையின் இலக்கு உள்ளிருக்கும் மற்றும் வெளி மொழி மதிப்பிடும் முறையில் இருக்கும் முறைமைகளின் எல்லைகளை கண்டறிதலாம். இந்த hypothesis தெரிவிக்க, நாம் ஆங்கிலத்தில் மற்றும் உள்ளிருக்கும் பரிசோதனைகளுக்கான தகவல் அமைப்புகளை உருவாக்கி 5 வேறு மொழி மாதிரிகளின்  முடிவுகள் கூறுகிறது வேறு உள்ளிருக்கும் மதிப்புகளின் மதிப்புகள் ஒருவருடன் இணைக்கவில்லை என்று. நாம் முடிவு செய்ய முடியும் என்றால் மனித குறிப்புகளை நிலத்தில் உண்மையாக பயன்படுத்தும் முறையாக முடியும் முடிவு செய்யலாம் முறை', 'sv': 'Syftet med detta arbete är att undersöka de möjliga begränsningarna av befintliga metoder för tvärspråklig ordinbäddning utvärdering, åtgärda bristen på korrelation mellan inre och yttre tvärspråkliga utvärderingsmetoder. För att bevisa denna hypotes konstruerar vi engelsk-ryska dataset för externa och inneboende utvärderingsuppgifter och jämför prestanda av 5 olika tvärspråksmodeller på dem. Resultaten säger att poängen även på olika inneboende riktmärken inte korrelerar med varandra. Vi kan dra slutsatsen att användningen av mänskliga referenser som grundsanning för korsspråkliga ordinbäddningar inte är korrekt om man inte förstår hur infödda talare bearbetar semantik i sin kognition.', 'so': 'Ujeedada shaqadaas waa in la baaraandegayo xadiiqooyin suurtagal ah oo ay jiraan qaababka ay ku qoran yihiin qiimeynta afka kala duwan ee lagu qorayo, iyadoo ku saabsan baahida xiriirka u dhexeeya qaababka qiimeynta afka gudaha iyo dibadda ah. Si aan u caddeyno fikradan, waxaynu u sameynaa sawirada luuqada Ingiriiska-Ruushka, si loo sameeyo qiimeynta gudaha iyo gudaha ah, waxaana isbarbardhignaa tababarada 5 noocyo kala duduwan oo luuqadaha kala duduwan. Abaalku waxay leedahay in xittaa qiimeeyaha gudaha kala duduwan isuguma xirna. Waxaannu ku dhameyn karnaa in isticmaalka dadka sida runta dhulka ah ee ku qoran hadalka kala duduwan looma habboon in qof aan garanayn sida ay u baaraandegaan aqoonsiga qofka afka hooyo.', 'ur': 'اس کام کا مطابق یہ ہے کہ کلاس زبان کے مطابق موجود مطابق کی محدودیت کا تحقیق کرنا ہے اور درونی اور خارجی کلاس زبان کے مطابق تعلق کے مطابق تعلق کی کثرت کا تعلق کرنا ہے. ہم انگلیسی-روسی ڈاٹ سٹ کو خارجی اور داخلی ارزیابی کاموں کے لئے بناتے ہیں اور ان پر پنج مختلف کرسٹ زبان مدل کے نمونے کے مطابق مقایسہ کرتے ہیں. نتیجے یہ کہتے ہیں کہ اسکور مختلف داخلی بنچم پر بھی ایک دوسرے سے تعلق نہیں رکھتے۔ ہمیں معلوم ہو سکتا ہے کہ انسان کی نسبتوں کا استعمال کرسی زبان کی نسبت سچی بات کے لئے اچھا نہیں ہے جب تک کسی کو معلوم نہ ہو کہ ملک کی نسبتوں کی نسبت ان کی شناخت میں سیمانتیک طریقہ کا طریقہ کیسا کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu ishning maqsadi, har xil tilning qiymatlarini qiymatlash uchun mavjud chegaralarni aniqlash, ichki va cheksiz cheksiz tilning qiymatlari usullarini o'rganish mumkin. Bu hypotheyasini tasavvur qilish uchun biz ingliz-Ruscha maʼlumotlar tizimini yaratimiz va ularning 5 ta boshqa bir xil tilning modellarini kamaytirish mumkin. Natijalar aytadi, har xil ichki qiymatlarning qiymatlari bir-бирларига bog'liq emas. Biz insonlarning foydalanuvchisi bir necha so'zlar ichki so'zlari ichki so'zlarning tuzilishi haqiqiqiy emas, agar hech kim natijadagi gapiruvchilarga qanday qilishni bilmaydi.", 'vi': 'Mục đích của công việc này là khám phá khả năng giới hạn của các phương pháp tổ chức các từ ngữ đã có, để giải quyết sự thiếu sự tương quan giữa các phương pháp đánh giá ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Để chứng minh giả thuyết này, chúng tôi xây dựng dữ liệu Anh-Nga để thực hiện các nhiệm vụ đánh giá dứt khoát và có thể so sánh các hoạt động của năm mô hình chữ khác nhau. Kết quả cho thấy điểm số thậm chí trên các tiêu chuẩn cơ bản khác nhau không liên quan đến nhau. Chúng ta có thể kết luận rằng việc sử dụng những chỉ dẫn con người như là chân lý cho sự nhúng vào những từ ngữ khác nhau là không đúng trừ khi người ta không hiểu được cách người nói bản xứ xử lý ngữ pháp theo ngữ pháp trong nhận thức của họ.', 'da': 'Formålet med dette arbejde er at undersøge de mulige begrænsninger af eksisterende metoder til tværsproget ordindlejring evaluering, hvor manglen på korrelation mellem iboende og ekstrensiske tværsprogede evalueringsmetoder løses. For at bevise denne hypotese konstruerer vi engelsk-russisk datasæt til ekstrensiske og iboende evalueringsopgaver og sammenligner ydeevnen af 5 forskellige tværsprogsmodeller på dem. Resultaterne siger, at scorerne selv på forskellige iboende benchmarks ikke korrelerer med hinanden. Vi kan konkludere, at brugen af menneskelige referencer som grundlæggende sandhed for indlejringer af ord på tværs af sprog ikke er korrekt, medmindre man ikke forstår, hvordan indfødte talere behandler semantik i deres kognition.', 'bg': 'Целта на тази работа е да се изследват възможните ограничения на съществуващите методи за оценка на междуезичните словесни вграждания, като се обърне внимание на липсата на корелация между вътрешните и външните методи за оценка на междуезичните езици. За да докажем тази хипотеза, конструираме англо-руски набори от данни за външни и вътрешни задачи за оценка и сравняваме показателите на 5 различни междуезични модела върху тях. Резултатите показват, че оценките дори и при различните присъщи показатели не се корелират помежду си. Можем да заключим, че използването на човешки препратки като основна истина за вграждането на междуезични думи не е правилно, освен ако човек не разбира как родните говорещи обработват семантиката в познанието си.', 'nl': 'Het doel van dit werk is om de mogelijke beperkingen van bestaande methoden van cross-language word embeddings evaluatie te onderzoeken, waarbij het gebrek aan correlatie tussen intrinsieke en extrinsieke cross-language evaluatiemethoden wordt aangepakt. Om deze hypothese te bewijzen, bouwen we Engels-Russische datasets voor extrinsieke en intrinsieke evaluatietaken en vergelijken we prestaties van vijf verschillende cross-tale modellen op hen. De resultaten zeggen dat de scores zelfs op verschillende intrinsieke benchmarks niet met elkaar correleren. We kunnen concluderen dat het gebruik van menselijke verwijzingen als grondwaarheid voor meertalige woordinbeddingen niet juist is tenzij men niet begrijpt hoe moedertaalsprekers semantiek verwerken in hun cognitie.', 'de': 'Das Ziel dieser Arbeit ist es, die möglichen Einschränkungen bestehender Methoden der sprachübergreifenden Bewertung von Worteinbettungen zu untersuchen, um die fehlende Korrelation zwischen intrinsischen und extrinsischen sprachübergreifenden Evaluationsmethoden zu beheben. Um diese Hypothese zu belegen, konstruieren wir englisch-russische Datensätze für extrinsische und intrinsische Evaluationsaufgaben und vergleichen die Leistungen von fünf verschiedenen sprachübergreifenden Modellen auf diesen. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Scores selbst bei unterschiedlichen intrinsischen Benchmarks nicht miteinander korrelieren. Wir können daraus schließen, dass die Verwendung menschlicher Referenzen als Grundwahrheit für sprachübergreifende Worteinbettungen nicht richtig ist, es sei denn, man versteht nicht, wie Muttersprachler Semantik in ihrer Wahrnehmung verarbeiten.', 'ko': '이 작업의 목적은 기존의 크로스 언어 단어 삽입 평가 방법이 존재할 수 있는 한계를 탐색하고 내재와 외재의 크로스 언어 평가 방법 사이에 관련성이 부족한 문제를 해결하는 것이다.이 가설을 증명하기 위해 우리는 외부와 내부 평가 임무에 사용되는 영국과 러시아의 데이터 집합을 구축하고 5가지 서로 다른 크로스 언어 모델이 이 두 임무에 나타난 것을 비교했다.그 결과 서로 다른 내적 기준에서도 점수 사이에는 상관성이 없다는 것이 밝혀졌다.사람들이 모국어인들이 인지 과정에서 의미를 어떻게 처리하는지 이해하지 못하면 인간의 참조를 다중 언어 단어로 삽입하는 기본적인 사실로 사용하는 것은 부적절하다는 결론을 얻을 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Lengo la kazi hii ni kutafuta uwezekano wa vizuizi vya njia zilizopo za kutathmini maneno yanayoingia katika lugha tofauti, kwa kuzihusisha ukosefu wa mahusiano kati ya njia za uchunguzi wa lugha za ndani na za nje. Ili kuthibitisha nadharia hii, tunajenga seti za takwimu za Kiingereza na Urusi kwa ajili ya kazi za uchunguzi wa ndani na za ndani na kuwalinganisha matukio ya mifano mitano tofauti ya lugha hizo. Matokeo hayo yanasema kwamba score hata kwenye misingi mbalimbali hazihusiana nayo. Tunaweza kuhitimisha kwamba matumizi ya wanadamu kama ukweli wa msingi wa maneno yanayoingia katika lugha tofauti si sahihi isipokuwa mtu asielewa jinsi gani watungumzaji wa asili wanavyoendesha mifano yao kwa kutambua.', 'id': 'Tujuan pekerjaan ini adalah untuk mengeksplorasi kemungkinan batasan dari metode eksistensi dari evaluasi penyambungan kata saling bahasa, mengatasi kekurangan korelasi antara metode penyambungan bahasa intrinsik dan ekstrinsik. Untuk membuktikan hipotesis ini, kami membangun dataset Inggris-Rusia untuk tugas ekstrinsik dan evaluasi intrinsik dan membandingkan prestasi dari 5 model salib bahasa berbeda pada mereka. The results say that the scores even on different intrinsic benchmarks do not correlate to each other.  We can conclude that the use of human references as ground truth for cross-language word embeddings is not proper unless one does not understand how do native speakers process semantics in their cognition.', 'hr': 'Cilj ovog rada je istražiti moguće ograničenja postojećih metoda procjene međujezičkih riječi u kojima se rješava nedostatak korelacije između unutrašnjih i ekstriničkih metoda procjene međujezika. Da bismo dokazali ovu hipotezu, konstruirali smo engleske-ruske podatke za zadatke ekstrinske i unutrašnje procjene i usporedili učinke od 5 različitih cross-language modela na njima. Rezultati kažu da rezultati čak i na različitim uvjetnim kriterijama se ne odnose međusobno. Možemo zaključiti da korištenje ljudskih referencija kao temeljna istina za uključenje međujezičkih riječi nije odgovarajuće osim ako ne razumije kako rodni govornici procesiraju semantike u njihovom poznavanju.', 'tr': 'Bu i힊i흫 maksady 힊u wagty흫 esasy dillerden 챌yky힊 etmek 체챌in bolan 챌yky힊lary흫 m체mkin 챌yky힊laryny ke힊fedmek, i챌i we ekstrinsici 챌arp dillerden 챌yky힊 첵체zerinde 챌yky힊 etmek 체챌in 챌yky힊 etmekdir. Bu hipotezyny kan캇tlamak 체챌in, biz I흫lis-Russi첵a veri setirlerini ekstrinsici we i챌indeki de흫lenmek 체챌in gurnu힊첵arys we olary흫 5 g철rn체힊 dil 철rneklerini kar힊캇la힊dyr첵arys. Netijeler farkl캇 i챌 da휓캇ndaki satmalar birbirine e힊le힊mez di첵ip s철yl체yorlar. Adamlary흫 referanslaryny 챌arpaz diller i챌erisinde 철z체ni n채dip bilme첵채n di첵ip pikir edebiliriz.', 'sq': 'Qëllimi i kësaj pune është të eksplorojë kufizimet e mundshme të metodave ekzistuese të vlerësimit të përfshirjes së fjalëve ndërgjuhësore, duke trajtuar mungesën e korrelacionit midis metodave brendshme dhe ekstrinzike të vlerësimit ndërgjuhësor. Për të vërtetuar këtë hipotezë, ne ndërtojmë grupe të dhënash anglo-ruse për detyrat e vlerësimit të jashtëm dhe të brendshëm dhe krahasojmë shfaqjet e 5 modeleve të ndryshme ndërgjuhësore mbi ta. Rezultatet thonë se rezultatet edhe në pika të ndryshme të brendshme nuk korrelohen me njëri-tjetrin. Ne mund të përfundojmë se përdorimi i referimeve njerëzore si e vërteta themelore për përfshirjet e fjalëve ndërgjuhësore nuk është i përshtatshëm përveç nëse nuk kuptohet se si folësit vendas procesojnë semantikën në njohjen e tyre.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքի նպատակն է ուսումնասիրել լեզվի միջև ներդրված բառերի գնահատման գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների հնարավոր սահմանափակումները, լուծելով ներքին և արտաքին լեզվի միջև ներդրված գնահատման մեթոդների կապվածության պակասը: To prove this hypothesis, we construct English-Russian datasets for extrinsic and intrinsic evaluation tasks and compare performances of 5 different cross-language models on them.  Արդյունքներն ասում են, որ արդյունքները նույնիսկ տարբեր ներքին հարաբերականների վրա չեն կապված միմյանց հետ: Մենք կարող ենք եզրակացնել, որ մարդկային հաղորդակցությունների օգտագործումը որպես հիմնական ճշմարտություն փոխլեզվով բառերի ներառման համար ճշմարտություն չէ, եթե չհասկանանք, թե ինչպես են մայրիկ խոսնակները վերլուծում սեմանտիկան իրենց ճանաչության մեջ:', 'az': 'Bu işin məqsədi, çox dil sözlərin çəkilməsinin mümkün sınırlarını keşfetmək, içəri və ekstrinsici çox dil çəkilmə metodları arasında bağlantılıq yoxdur. Bu hipotezi kanıtlamaq üçün biz İngilis-Rus veri setlərini extrinsic və iç değerlendirmə işləri üçün inşa edirik və onların üstündə 5 cür dil modellərinin performanslarını salırıq. Sonuçlar deyirlər ki, dəyişiklik dəyişiklik dəyişikliklər bir-birinə bağlanmır. İnsanların istifadəsinin çox dil sözlərinin istifadəsi kimi istifadə edilməsi yaxşı deyildir, ancaq bir kəs yerli sözlərin tanıdıqlarında semantik işləməsini anlamaz.', 'am': 'የዚህ ሥራው ግንኙነት የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ አካባቢ የሆኑን የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ለመፈለግ ነው፡፡ ይህንን hypothesis ለማረጋገጥ፣ እንግሊዘኛ-ራሽኛ ዳታተርዎችን ለውጭ እና ውጤት ለማድረግ እና 5 ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለመተካከል እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረቱም የተለያዩ የውይይት አካባቢዎች እንኳ እርስ በርሳቸው አይታሰራም፡፡ የሰው መልዕክቶች መሬት እውነተኛ መሆኑን ለመፍጠር እንችላለን፡፡', 'bn': 'এই কাজের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে বিদ্যমান ভাষার মূল্যের বিভিন্ন সীমাবদ্ধতা খুঁজে বের করার সম্ভাব্য সীমাবদ্ধতা ব্যবহার করা যায়, যেখানে বিভিন্ন ভাষার বিভ এই হিপাইটসিস প্রমাণ করার জন্য আমরা ইংরেজী ও রাশিয়ান ডাটাসেট তৈরি করি বিদেশী এবং ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষার মডেলের প্রদর্শনের তুলনা  ফলাফল বলে যে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ব আমরা উপসংহার করতে পারি যে মানুষের ব্যবহার ক্ষেত্রে মানুষের মানুষের ব্যবহার ক্ষমতার সত্য হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা যাচ্ছে ক্ষমতাশীল শব্দের প্রব', 'af': 'Die doel van hierdie werk is om die moontlike beperkinge van bestaande metodes van kruistaal woord inbettings evaluasie te ondersoek en die mislukking van konerlasie tussen intrinsiese en ekstrinsiese kruistaal evaluasie metodes te ondersoek. Om hierdie hipotesis te bevestig, bou ons Engels-Russiese datastelle vir ekstrinsiese en intrinsiese evalueringstaak en vergelyk uitvoegings van 5 verskillende kruistaal modele op hulle. Die resultate sê dat die punte selfs op verskillende intrinsiese benchmarke nie met mekaar verbind nie. Ons kan uitsluit dat die gebruik van menslike verwysings as grond waarheid vir kruistaal woord inbettings nie regverdig is tensy een nie verstaan hoe natuurlike sprekkers semantieke in hulle kognisie proses nie.', 'fa': 'هدف این کار این است که محدودیت ممکن وجود دارد از روش\u200cهای ارزیابی کلمه\u200cهای مختلف زبان\u200cها را تحقیق کنید، و در مورد ناتوانی ارتباط بین روش\u200cهای ارزیابی درون و خارج زبان\u200cها را حل کنید. برای ثابت کردن این فرضیه، ما مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای انگلیسی-روسی برای کارهای ارزیابی خارجی و داخلی ساخته می\u200cکنیم و نمایش\u200cهای ۵ مدل\u200cهای مختلف زبان بر آنها مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cها می\u200cگویند که نمایش\u200cها حتی در نمایش\u200cهای داخلی متفاوت با یکدیگر ارتباطی ندارند. ما می توانیم تصمیم بگیریم که استفاده از ارتباطات انسان به عنوان حقیقت زمینی برای ارتباطات کلمات مختلف زبان مناسبی نیست مگر اینکه کسی درک نکرد که چگونه سخن\u200cگویان زمینی در آگاهی خودشان سیمانتیک را روشن می\u200cکنند.', 'ca': "L'objectiu d'aquesta feina és explorar les limitacions possibles dels mètodes existents d'evaluació de l'incorporació de paraules en llenguatges transversals, abordant la falta de correlació entre mètodes intrínsecs i extrínsics d'evaluació transversal. Per demostrar aquesta hipòtesi, construïm conjunts de dades anglo-russos per a tasques extrínsiques i intrínsecs d'evaluació i comparam els desempenys de cinc models de llenguatge diferent. Els resultats diuen que les puntuacions fins i tot en diferents punts de referència intrínsecs no correlacionen entre elles. We can conclude that the use of human references as ground truth for cross-language word embeddings is not proper unless one does not understand how do native speakers process semantics in their cognition.", 'et': 'Käesoleva töö eesmärk on uurida olemasolevate keeleüleste sõnade manustamise hindamise meetodite võimalikke piiranguid, käsitledes korrelatsiooni puudumist sisemise ja välise keeleülese hindamise meetodite vahel. Selle hüpoteesi tõestamiseks ehitame inglise-vene andmekogumid väliste ja sisemise hindamise ülesannete jaoks ning võrdleme nende puhul viie erineva keeleülese mudeli tulemusi. Tulemused ütlevad, et isegi erinevate sisemiste võrdlusnäitajate tulemused ei korreleeri omavahel. Võime järeldada, et inimviidete kasutamine alustõena keeleüleste sõnade manustamisel ei ole õige, kui ei saa aru, kuidas emakeelsed kõnelejad oma tunnetuses semantikat töötlevad.', 'cs': 'Cílem této práce je prozkoumat možná omezení stávajících metod hodnocení mezi jazykovými vloženími slov, řešit nedostatek korelace mezi vnitřními a extrinsickými metodami vícejazyčného hodnocení. K prokázání této hypotézy konstruujeme anglicko-ruské datové sady pro extrinsické a intrinsické hodnotící úlohy a porovnáváme výkony pěti různých cross-jazyčných modelů na nich. Výsledky říkají, že skóre ani na různých vnitřních benchmarkech vzájemně nekorelují. Můžeme dojít k závěru, že použití lidských odkazů jako základní pravdy pro vkládání slov mezi jazyky není správné, pokud člověk nerozumí tomu, jak rodilí mluvčí zpracovávají sémantiku ve svém poznání.', 'fi': 'Tämän työn tavoitteena on tutkia olemassa olevien monikielisten sanaupotusten arviointimenetelmien mahdollisia rajoituksia ja puuttua sisäisten ja ulkoisten monikielisten arviointimenetelmien väliseen korrelaatioon. Tämän hypoteesin todistamiseksi rakennamme englanti-venäjänkielisiä aineistoja ulkoisiin ja luontaisiin arviointitehtäviin ja vertaamme niihin viittä eri kielimallia. Tulokset osoittavat, että jopa eri luontaisilla vertailuarvoilla saadut pisteet eivät korreloi keskenään. Voimme päätellä, että inhimillisten viittausten käyttö pohjatotuutena monikielisissä sanaupotuksissa ei ole asianmukaista, ellei ymmärretä, miten äidinkielenään puhuvat käsittelevät semantiikkaa kognitiossaan.', 'bs': 'Cilj ovog rada je istraživanje mogućih ograničenja postojećih metoda procjene međujezičkih riječi u kojima se uključuje nedostatak korelacije između unutrašnjih i ekstriničkih metoda procjene međujezika. Da bismo dokazali ovu hipotezu, izgradili smo engleske-ruske datasete za izvanzemaljske i unutrašnje procjene zadataka i usporedili izvode od 5 različitih cross-language modela na njima. Rezultati kažu da rezultati čak i na različitim uvjetnim kriterijama se ne odnose međusobno. Možemo zaključiti da upotreba ljudskih referencija kao temeljna istina za uključenje međujezičkih riječi nije odgovarajuća, osim ako ne razumije kako rodni govornici procesiraju semantike u njihovom poznavanju.', 'sk': 'Cilj tega dela je raziskati možne omejitve obstoječih metod vrednotenja medjezikovnih vključevanj besed in obravnavati pomanjkanje korelacije med intrinzičnimi in zunanjimi metodami vrednotenja medjezikovnih. Da bi dokazali to hipotezo, gradimo angleško-ruske nabore podatkov za zunanje in notranje vrednotenje nalog ter primerjamo uspešnosti 5 različnih medjezikovnih modelov na njih. Rezultati kažejo, da rezultati tudi na različnih notranjih referenčnih vrednostih niso medsebojno povezani. Zaključimo lahko, da uporaba človeških referenc kot osnovne resnice za vgradnjo besed med jeziki ni primerna, razen če ne razumemo, kako materni govorci v svojem spoznavanju obdelujejo semantiko.', 'ha': "Yaaimin wannan aikin shine a gane da ana iya ƙayyade hanyõyi masu jira na hanyoyin maganar-tsohon-magana wanda za'a ci-ƙunci, da kuma a jayaye manyan haɗi a tsakanin hanyar qiymati-na'ura na guda da bakin-harshe. To prove this hypothesis, we construct English-Russian datasets for extrinsic and intrinsic evaluation tasks and compare performances of 5 different cross-language models on them.  Mataimakin na ce, ko kuma ko da akan cikin guda ba su yi bincike da jũna ba. Kana iya ƙara cẽwa, amfani da mutane kamar gaskiya ne ga magana wanda ke cikin harshen na ƙẽƙasasshiya ba ta zama daidai ba sai wanda ba ya fahimta yadda mutane na samuran mutane ke cikin sunansu.", 'jv': 'Rayongno nggunakake iki wis kelas kuwi nggawe perusahaan mrogram kanggo mbataluk urip bantuan, nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno nggawe gerakan wih-wih basa. Ngawe ngerti apa winih iki, kita sampeyan dataset ingles-Rusak kanggo nyelarakno anu kartulit cara-cara nggawe barang langgar sampeyan mruput 5 ulih perusahaan model karo perusahaan langgar. Wulangan nambarang, ditambah-nambarang langgambar luwih-luwih sing wis ngerasah Awak dhéwé iso ngerti, nggambar aturan sing paling kelelah dumadhi kanggo ngerasah barang langgar sampeyan winih.', 'he': 'המטרה של העבודה הזו היא לחקור את ההגבלות האפשריות של שיטות קיימות של עריכת מילים בין שפת-חוצה כדי להוכיח את ההיפתוזה הזו, אנחנו בונים קבוצות נתונים אנגלי-רוסית עבור משימות עריכה חיצוניות ובתוכניות ולהשוות ביצועים של 5 דוגמנים משולבים שונים עליהם. התוצאות אומרות שהנקודות אפילו על נקודות רמז פנימיות שונות לא מתחברות זה לזה. אנו יכולים להסכם שהשימוש של התייחסות אנושיות כאמת קרקעית למילים חצות אינו מתאים אלא אם כן לא ניתן להבין איך מדברים מקומיים מעבדים סמנטיקה בהכרה שלהם.', 'bo': 'དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདིའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། To prove this hypothesis, we construct English-Russian datasets for extrinsic and intrinsic evaluation tasks and compare performances of 5 different cross-language models on them. ཐོག་འབྲས་བ་ནི་ནང་འཁོད་གཞུང་གི་ཚད་ལྟར་མེད་པར་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚིག་རྐྱེན་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡོད་མེད། ང་ཚོས་འཛིན་བྱས་ཆོག་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟངས་འཛིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'How Gender and Skin Tone Modifiers Affect Emoji Semantics in Twitter', 'ar': 'كيف تؤثر معدّلات الجنس ولون البشرة على دلالات الرموز التعبيرية في تويتر', 'fr': 'Comment les modificateurs de genre et de teint affectent la sémantique des emoji sur Twitter', 'es': 'Cómo los modificadores de género y tono de piel afectan la semántica de los emojis', 'pt': 'Como os modificadores de gênero e tom de pele afetam a semântica dos emojis no Twitter', 'ru': 'Как модификаторы пола и тона кожи влияют на семантику эмодзи в Twitter', 'ja': 'ジェンダーと肌色のモディファイアがTwitterの絵文字セマンティクスに与える影響', 'ga': 'Mar a théann Athraithe Inscne agus Ton Craiceann i bhfeidhm ar Shéimeantaic Emoji ar Twitter', 'zh': '性别肤色修饰符 Twitter 何以感表情符号语义', 'hi': 'कैसे लिंग और त्वचा टोन संशोधक चहचहाना में इमोजी शब्दार्थ को प्रभावित', 'hu': 'Hogyan befolyásolják a nemek és a bőrtónus módosítók az emoji szemantikát a Twitteren', 'el': 'Πώς οι τροποποιητές τόνου φύλου και δέρματος επηρεάζουν τη σημασιολογία στο Twitter', 'ka': 'როგორ განსხვავებელი გენერები და ცენერების ტონის მომდინარებელი ტევიტორიში ემოჯია სემანტიკების შემდეგ', 'it': 'Come i modificatori di sesso e tono della pelle influenzano la semantica delle emoji su Twitter', 'lt': 'Kaip lyčių ir odos tonos modifikatoriai veikia emojų Semantiką Twitter', 'ms': 'How Gender and Skin Tone Modifiers Affect Emoji Semantics in Twitter', 'mk': 'Како менувачите на половите и кожната тона влијаат на емојската семантика на Твитер', 'ml': 'എമോജി സെമാന്റിക്സിനെ ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d എങ്ങനെ പ്രശ്നിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Kif Modifikaturi tas-Sess u t-Tonn tal-Ġilda jaffettwaw is-Semanti Emoji fuq Twitter', 'kk': 'Твиттерде гендер және теңіз тонды өзгертушілер көңіл күйлерінің шемантикалығын қалай әсер етеді', 'no': 'Korleis gener- og tematoneendringar påvirkar emoji- semantikk i Twitter', 'ro': 'Cum influențează sexul și modificarea tonurilor pielii semantice emojice în Twitter', 'mn': 'Твиттерт Эмози Semantics-г хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг', 'sr': 'Kako modifikatori kože i sposobnosti utiču na semantike emoji na Twitter', 'si': 'කොහොමද ජෙන්ඩර් සහ ස්කින් ටෝන් වෙනස් කරණාකරුවෝ ට්විටර් වල එමෝජි සෙමාන්ටික් ප්\u200dරති', 'pl': 'Jak modyfikatory płci i koloru skóry wpływają na semantykę emoji na Twitterze', 'so': 'Sida loo beddelayo habka iyo dhaqaalaha isbedelka ee Emoji Semantics ee Twitterka', 'sv': 'Hur köns- och hudtonemodifierare påverkar emoji semantik på Twitter', 'ur': 'ٹویٹر میں جنس اور اسکین ٹون بدلنے والے ایموجی سیمانٹیکس کیسے اثر دیتے ہیں', 'ta': 'எவ்வாறு இனம் மற்றும் Skin Tone மாற்றங்கள் எமோஜி செமாண்டிக்களை தொடர்ந்து பாதிக்கிறது', 'uz': 'How Gender and Skin Tone Modifiers Affect Emoji Semantics in Twitter', 'vi': 'Cách Cải tiến khí sắc và sắc màu liên quan đến cảm xúc hóa trên Twitter', 'bg': 'Как модификаторите за пола и тона на кожата влияят на семантиката на емоджи в Туитър', 'hr': 'Kako modifikatori sposobnih i kožnih tone utjecaju na emoji semantike na Twitter', 'nl': "Hoe gender- en huidtintmodifiers de emotiesema's beïnvloeden in Twitter", 'da': 'Hvordan køn- og hudtonemodifikatorer påvirker Emoji Semantics på Twitter', 'de': 'Wie Gender- und Hautton-Modifikatoren Emoji-Semantik in Twitter beeinflussen', 'id': 'How Gender and Skin Tone Modifiers Affect Emoji Semantics in Twitter', 'ko': '성별과 피부색 수식어가 트위터의 이모티콘 의미에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지', 'fa': 'چگونه تغییردهندگان سن جنسی و پوستی در توئیتر اثر سیمانتیک ایموزی', 'sw': 'Namna mabadiliko ya Kijinsia na Skin yanavyoathiri Semantiki za Emoji kwenye mtandao wa Twita', 'tr': "Twitter'da Nähili Azat we Taýry Ton üýtgewçiler Emoji Semantikleri Etkilendirler", 'sq': 'Si ndryshuesit e gjinit dhe tonës së lëkurës ndikojnë në Semantikën Emoji në Twitter', 'af': 'Hoe Gender en Skin Tone Modifiseerders Afteken Emoji Semantics in Twitter', 'am': 'የዝሙት እና የስካን ተቃውሞዎች የኢሞዮ ሴማኒክ በትዊተር ላይ እንዴት ያስጨንቃሉ', 'az': 'Twitterd…ô cins v…ô d…ôri Ton d…ôyiŇüdiricil…ôri', 'ca': 'Com els modificadors de gènere i tonalitat de pellafecten a la Semàtica Emoji a Twitter', 'hy': 'Ինչպե՞ս գենդերային և մաշկի տոնի փոփոխիչները ազդում են Թվիթերում էմոյի սեմանտիկային', 'bn': 'কিভাবে লিঙ্গ এবং স্কেন টোন পরিবর্তনেরা টুইটারে এমোজি সেমান্টিকে প্রভাবিত করেছেন', 'bs': 'Kako modifikatori kože i sposobnosti utiču na semantike emoji na Twitter', 'fi': 'Miten sukupuolen ja ihonvärin muokkaajat vaikuttavat emojisemantiikkaan Twitterissä', 'cs': 'Jak modifikátory pohlaví a tónu pleti ovlivňují sémantiku emoji na Twitteru', 'et': 'Kuidas soo- ja nahatooni modifitseerijad mõjutavad emojisemantikat Twitteris', 'jv': 'Piye ngerti lan kelas-kelas Tulungan Ketokaké emuji semanti nang Google', 'sk': 'Kako spreminjalci spola in tona kože vplivajo na emojijsko semantiko v Twitterju', 'he': 'איך מין ומשתנות טון עור משפיעים על סמנטיקה של אמואי בטוויטר', 'ha': 'Jinsi da Hukin Tone Modifiers Affect Emoji Semantics on Twitter', 'bo': 'Twitter ནང་དུ་ཇི་ལྟར་དང་Skin Tone བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་པ་ཚོར་བ་ནུས་ཚོད་བློ་གཏོང་ནུས་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper we analyze the use of emojis in social media with respect to gender and skin tone. By gathering a dataset of over twenty two million tweets from United States some findings are clearly highlighted after performing a simple frequency-based analysis. Moreover, we carry out a semantic analysis on the usage of emojis and their modifiers (e.g. gender and skin tone) by embedding all words, emojis and modifiers into the same vector space. Our analyses reveal that some stereotypes related to the skin color and gender seem to be reflected on the use of these modifiers. For example, emojis representing hand gestures are more widely utilized with lighter skin tones, and the usage across skin tones differs significantly. At the same time, the vector corresponding to the male modifier tends to be semantically close to emojis related to business or technology, whereas their female counterparts appear closer to emojis about love or makeup.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نحلل استخدام الرموز التعبيرية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي فيما يتعلق بالجنس ولون البشرة. من خلال جمع مجموعة بيانات تزيد عن 22 مليون تغريدة من الولايات المتحدة ، يتم تسليط الضوء على بعض النتائج بوضوح بعد إجراء تحليل بسيط قائم على التردد. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بإجراء تحليل دلالي لاستخدام الرموز التعبيرية ومعدلاتها (مثل الجنس ولون البشرة) من خلال تضمين جميع الكلمات والرموز التعبيرية والمعدلات في نفس مساحة المتجه. تكشف تحليلاتنا أن بعض الصور النمطية المتعلقة بلون البشرة والجنس يبدو أنها تنعكس على استخدام هذه المعدلات. على سبيل المثال ، يتم استخدام الرموز التعبيرية التي تمثل إيماءات اليد على نطاق واسع مع درجات لون البشرة الفاتحة ، ويختلف الاستخدام عبر درجات لون البشرة بشكل كبير. في الوقت نفسه ، يميل المتجه المقابل لمعدِّل الذكر إلى أن يكون قريبًا من الناحية اللغوية من الرموز التعبيرية المتعلقة بالعمل أو التكنولوجيا ، بينما تبدو نظيراتهن من الإناث أقرب إلى الرموز التعبيرية المتعلقة بالحب أو الماكياج.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo analisamos o uso de emojis nas mídias sociais em relação ao gênero e tom de pele. Ao reunir um conjunto de dados de mais de vinte e dois milhões de tweets dos Estados Unidos, algumas descobertas são claramente destacadas após a realização de uma análise simples baseada em frequência. Além disso, realizamos uma análise semântica sobre o uso de emojis e seus modificadores (por exemplo, gênero e tom de pele) incorporando todas as palavras, emojis e modificadores no mesmo espaço vetorial. Nossas análises revelam que alguns estereótipos relacionados à cor da pele e ao gênero parecem se refletir no uso desses modificadores. Por exemplo, emojis que representam gestos de mão são mais amplamente utilizados com tons de pele mais claros, e o uso em tons de pele difere significativamente. Ao mesmo tempo, o vetor correspondente ao modificador masculino tende a ser semanticamente próximo aos emojis relacionados a negócios ou tecnologia, enquanto suas contrapartes femininas parecem mais próximas aos emojis sobre amor ou maquiagem.', 'es': 'En este artículo analizamos el uso de emojis en las redes sociales con respecto al género y el tono de piel. Al recopilar un conjunto de datos de más de veintidós millones de tuits de Estados Unidos, algunos hallazgos se destacan claramente después de realizar un simple análisis basado en la frecuencia. Además, realizamos un análisis semántico sobre el uso de emojis y sus modificadores (por ejemplo, género y tono de piel) mediante la incorporación de todas las palabras, emojis y modificadores en el mismo espacio vectorial. Nuestros análisis revelan que algunos estereotipos relacionados con el color de la piel y el género parecen reflejarse en el uso de estos modificadores. Por ejemplo, los emojis que representan gestos con las manos se utilizan más ampliamente con tonos de piel más claros, y el uso en todos los tonos de piel difiere significativamente. Al mismo tiempo, el vector correspondiente al modificador masculino tiende a ser semánticamente cercano a los emojis relacionados con los negocios o la tecnología, mientras que sus homólogos femeninos parecen más cercanos a los emojis sobre el amor o el maquillaje.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous analysons l'utilisation des émojis dans les médias sociaux en fonction du sexe et du teint. En rassemblant un ensemble de données de plus de vingt-deux millions de tweets provenant des États-Unis, certains résultats sont clairement mis en évidence après une simple analyse basée sur la fréquence. De plus, nous effectuons une analyse sémantique de l'utilisation des emojis et de leurs modificateurs (par exemple, le genre et la couleur de la peau) en intégrant tous les mots, émojis et modificateurs dans le même espace vectoriel. Nos analyses révèlent que certains stéréotypes liés à la couleur de la peau et au sexe semblent se refléter dans l'utilisation de ces modificateurs. Par exemple, les émojis représentant les gestes de la main sont plus largement utilisés avec des tons de peau plus clairs, et l'utilisation entre les tons de peau varie considérablement. Dans le même temps, le vecteur correspondant au modificateur masculin tend à être sémantiquement proche des émojis liés aux affaires ou à la technologie, tandis que leurs homologues féminins apparaissent plus proches des émojis sur l'amour ou le maquillage.", 'ja': '本稿では、ソーシャルメディアにおける絵文字の性別や肌の色調に関する利用について分析する。米国から2,200万を超えるツイートのデータセットを収集することにより、単純な周波数ベースの分析を行った後、いくつかの調査結果が明確に強調表示されます。さらに、すべての単語、絵文字、修飾子を同じベクトル空間に埋め込むことにより、絵文字とその修飾子の使用（性別や肌の色調など）について意味分析を行います。私たちの分析によると、肌の色や性別に関連するステレオタイプが、これらの修飾子の使用に反映されているようです。例えば、手のジェスチャーを表す絵文字は、より軽いスキントーンでより広く利用され、スキントーン全体での使用は著しく異なる。同時に、男性修飾子に対応するベクトルは、ビジネスまたはテクノロジーに関連する絵文字に意味的に近い傾向がありますが、女性の相手は、恋愛または化粧についての絵文字に近いように見えます。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы анализируем использование эмодзи в социальных сетях в отношении пола и тона кожи. Собирая набор данных из более чем двадцати двух миллионов твитов из Соединенных Штатов, некоторые выводы четко выделяются после проведения простого частотного анализа. Кроме того, мы проводим семантический анализ использования эмодзи и их модификаторов (например, пол и тон кожи), встраивая все слова, эмодзи и модификаторы в одно векторное пространство. Наши анализы показывают, что некоторые стереотипы, связанные с цветом кожи и полом, по-видимому, отражаются на использовании этих модификаторов. Например, смайлики, представляющие жесты рук, более широко используются с более светлыми тонами кожи, и использование в разных тонах кожи значительно отличается. При этом вектор, соответствующий мужскому модификатору, как правило, семантически близок к эмодзи, связанным с бизнесом или технологией, тогда как их женские аналоги ближе к эмодзи о любви или макияже.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid anailís ar úsáid emojis ar na meáin shóisialta maidir le hinscne agus ton craicinn. Trí thacair sonraí de bhreis is fiche dó mhilliún tweet a bhailiú ó na Stáit Aontaithe, leagtar béim shoiléir ar roinnt torthaí tar éis anailís shimplí bunaithe ar mhinicíocht a dhéanamh. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid anailís shéimeantach ar úsáid emojis agus a modhnóirí (m.sh. inscne agus ton craiceann) trí gach focal, emojis agus modhnóirí a neadú sa spás veicteora céanna. Nochtann ár n-anailísí go bhfuil an chuma ar roinnt steiréitíopaí a bhaineann le dath craicinn agus inscne le húsáid na modhnóirí. Mar shampla, baintear úsáid níos forleithne as emojis a léiríonn gothaí láimhe le toin chraicinn níos éadroime, agus tá difríocht shuntasach idir an úsáid trasna toin chraicinn. Ag an am céanna, is gnách go mbíonn an veicteoir a fhreagraíonn don mhodhnóir fireann gar do emojis a bhaineann le gnó nó le teicneolaíocht go semantach, ach bíonn a gcomhghleacaithe baineanna níos gaire do emojis faoi ghrá nó makeup.', 'zh': '于本文,论社交媒体中表情符号性别肤色之用。 采美国过两千两百万条推文之数,简略之论,昭然显著。 凡单词,表情符号与修饰符嵌同向量空中,表情符号及修饰符(如性别肤色)者语义之。 臣等分析表明,与肤色性别刻板印象,似在修饰符用。 如手势之表情符号,博施浅色,而用异甚多。 又男饰符者向量语义近商贾之表情符号,女应物似近爱化之表情符号。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम लिंग और त्वचा टोन के संबंध में सोशल मीडिया में इमोजी के उपयोग का विश्लेषण करते हैं। संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका से बाईस मिलियन से अधिक ट्वीट्स के डेटासेट को इकट्ठा करके कुछ निष्कर्षों को एक सरल आवृत्ति-आधारित विश्लेषण करने के बाद स्पष्ट रूप से हाइलाइट किया गया है। इसके अलावा, हम इमोजी और उनके संशोधकों (जैसे लिंग और त्वचा टोन) के उपयोग पर एक शब्दार्थ विश्लेषण करते हैं, जो सभी शब्दों, इमोजी और संशोधकों को एक ही वेक्टर स्पेस में एम्बेड करके होता है। हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि त्वचा के रंग और लिंग से संबंधित कुछ रूढ़िवादी इन संशोधकों के उपयोग पर परिलक्षित होते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, हाथ के इशारों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने वाले इमोजी हल्के त्वचा टोन के साथ अधिक व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाते हैं, और त्वचा के टन में उपयोग काफी भिन्न होता है। उसी समय, पुरुष संशोधक के अनुरूप वेक्टर व्यवसाय या प्रौद्योगिकी से संबंधित इमोजी के करीब होता है, जबकि उनकी महिला समकक्ष प्यार या मेकअप के बारे में इमोजी के करीब दिखाई देती हैं।', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία αναλύουμε τη χρήση των στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης σε σχέση με το φύλο και τον τόνο του δέρματος. Συγκεντρώνοντας ένα σύνολο δεδομένων πάνω από είκοσι δύο εκατομμύρια tweets από τις Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες ορισμένα ευρήματα επισημαίνονται σαφώς μετά από την εκτέλεση μιας απλής ανάλυσης βασισμένης στη συχνότητα. Επιπλέον, διεξάγουμε μια σημασιολογική ανάλυση για τη χρήση των και των τροποποιητών τους (π.χ. φύλο και τόνο δέρματος) ενσωματώνοντας όλες τις λέξεις, τις και τους τροποποιητές στον ίδιο διανυσματικό χώρο. Οι αναλύσεις μας αποκαλύπτουν ότι ορισμένα στερεότυπα που σχετίζονται με το χρώμα του δέρματος και το φύλο φαίνεται να αντικατοπτρίζονται στη χρήση αυτών των τροποποιητών. Για παράδειγμα, τα που αντιπροσωπεύουν χειρονομίες χεριών χρησιμοποιούνται ευρέως με ελαφρύτερους τόνους δέρματος και η χρήση μεταξύ των τόνων δέρματος διαφέρει σημαντικά. Ταυτόχρονα, το διάνυσμα που αντιστοιχεί στον αρσενικό τροποποιητή τείνει να είναι σημασιολογικά κοντά σε εμόζι που σχετίζονται με την επιχείρηση ή την τεχνολογία, ενώ τα θηλυκά ομόλογά τους φαίνονται πιο κοντά σε εμόζι για την αγάπη ή το μακιγιάζ.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban elemezzük az emojik használatát a közösségi médiában a nemek és a bőrtónus tekintetében. Az Egyesült Államokból származó több mint huszonkét millió tweetből álló adatkészlet összegyűjtésével egyes megállapítások egyértelműen kiemelkednek egy egyszerű frekvenciaalapú elemzés után. Ezenkívül szemantikai elemzést végzünk az emojik és azok módosítóinak használatáról (pl. nem és bőrtónus) úgy, hogy minden szót, emojit és módosítót egy vektortérbe ágyazunk. Elemzéseink azt mutatják, hogy a bőrszínhez és a nemhez kapcsolódó sztereotípiák tükröződnek e módosítók használatában. Például a kézmozdulatokat ábrázoló emojik szélesebb körben használják világosabb bőrtónusokkal, és a bőrtónusok közötti használat jelentősen eltér. Ugyanakkor a férfi módosítónak megfelelő vektor általában szemantikusan közel áll az üzlethez vagy technológiához kapcsolódó emojikhoz, míg női társaik közelebb kerülnek a szerelemről vagy sminkről szóló emojikhoz.', 'it': "In questo articolo analizziamo l'uso delle emoji nei social media rispetto al genere e al tono della pelle. Raccogliendo un set di dati di oltre ventidue milioni di tweet dagli Stati Uniti alcuni risultati sono chiaramente evidenziati dopo aver eseguito una semplice analisi basata sulla frequenza. Inoltre, eseguiamo un'analisi semantica sull'uso delle emoji e dei loro modificatori (ad esempio sesso e tono della pelle) incorporando tutte le parole, emoji e modificatori nello stesso spazio vettoriale. Le nostre analisi rivelano che alcuni stereotipi legati al colore della pelle e al genere sembrano riflettersi sull'uso di questi modificatori. Ad esempio, le emoji che rappresentano i gesti delle mani sono più ampiamente utilizzate con toni della pelle più chiari e l'uso tra i toni della pelle differisce significativamente. Allo stesso tempo, il vettore corrispondente al modificatore maschile tende ad essere semanticamente vicino alle emoji legate al business o alla tecnologia, mentre le loro controparti femminili appaiono più vicine alle emoji sull'amore o sul trucco.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, әлемдік медиақтардың көңіл қолдануын гендер мен тұмандығына қатынасыз. Қарапайым жиілікті анализ істегеннен кейбір тапсырмалар Америкадан 20 миллионнан артық tweet жиілігін жинақтау арқылы таңдалады. Сонымен қатар, біз көңіл көңіл және өзгертушерінің (мысалы, гендер және қалдық түсініктері) пайдалануын семантикалық анализ істеп, барлық сөздерді, көңіл және өзгертушерін бір вектор орынға Біздің анализациямыз кейбір стереотиптері қырқының түсімен гендерге қатынасыз бар дегенді көрсетеді. Бұл өзгертулердің пайдалануына қарай көрсетіледі. Мысалы, қол жұмыс белгілерін көрсету көмегімен көңіл түстер түсіндірілген көмегімен қолданылады. Қызметтер түсіндірілген көмегімен қолданылады. Еркекті өзгертушілеріне сәйкес келетін вектор бизнес не технологиялық көзгертушілеріне сәйкес келетін эмогиялық көзгертушілеріне жақын болады, бірақ әйелдердің көзгертушілері сәйкес не жа', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ ვიანალიზებთ ემოიზების გამოყენება საზოგადო მედიაში, რომელიც გენექცია და ფეხის ტონის შესახებ. ამერიკეთებული შტატებიდან უფრო მეტი ორი მილიონი ტივიტის მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას წარმოიდგენა, როდესაც მარტივი განსაზღვრებული ანალიზაციის შემდეგ გავაკეთ დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სენმანტიკური ანალიზაცია ემოიზების და მათი რედაქტირების გამოყენებაზე (მაგალითად, გენდერი და ცხოვრების ტონი) ყველა სიტყვები, ემოიზები და რედაქტირების ერთი გვ ჩვენი ანალიზები აღმოჩნენ, რომ ზოგიერთი სტერეოტიპები, რომლებიც კურნალის ფერის და გენდერის შესახებ, გამოიყენება ამ მოცემების გამოყენებაზე. მაგალითად, ემოიზები, რომელიც გამოსახულებენ ხელ გესტები, უფრო დიდი გამოყენებული უფრო სიმაღლედ სიმაღლედ, და გამოყენება სიმაღლედ განსხვავება. იგივე დროში, ვიქტორი, რომელიც მყაროს შეცდომარებისთვის კონფიგურაციას მხოლოდ იყოს სემანტიკურად მხოლოდ ვიქნება სამუშაო ან ტექნოლოგიისთვის შესახებ, როცა მათი ქალური', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d ഇമോജിസിന്റെ ഉപയോഗം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. പുരുഷന്മാരും തൊലി അമേരിക്കയില്\u200d നിന്നും 20 മില്ല്യണ്\u200d ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d കുറച്ച് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന് അതുകൊണ്ടും, ഇമോജിസിന്\u200dറെയും മോഡിമോക്ടറുകളുടെയും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും സെമാന്റിക് അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ വാക്കുകള നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു ഈ മോഡിഫയര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ചില സ്റ്റീറിയോട്ടികളുടെയും ത ഉദാഹരണത്തിനുള്ള ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി ഇമോജിക്ക് കൈകള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിപ്പിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d വിശാലമായി തൊലി ടോണുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കു അതേ സമയത്ത്, ആണുങ്ങളുടെ മോഡിഫയര്\u200dക്ക് സമ്മതിക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്കാല്\u200d ബിസിനസ് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയോടോ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഇമോജി', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menganalisis penggunaan emoji dalam media sosial mengenai jenis dan nada kulit. Dengan mengumpulkan set data lebih dari dua puluh dua juta tweet dari Amerika Syarikat beberapa penemuan jelas diterangkan selepas melakukan analisis yang mudah berdasarkan frekuensi. Selain itu, kita melakukan analisis semantik tentang penggunaan emoji dan pengubahsuai mereka (cth. jenis dan nada kulit) dengan memasukkan semua perkataan, emoji dan pengubahsuai ke ruang vektor yang sama. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa beberapa stereotip yang berkaitan dengan warna kulit dan jenis kelihatan tergambar pada penggunaan pengubahsuai ini. Contohnya, emoji yang mewakili gerakan tangan lebih luas digunakan dengan nada kulit yang lebih ringan, dan penggunaan melalui nada kulit berbeza secara signifikan. Pada masa yang sama, vektor yang sepadan dengan pengubahsuai lelaki cenderung secara semantik dekat dengan emoji berkaitan dengan perniagaan atau teknologi, sementara rakan-rakan perempuan mereka kelihatan lebih dekat dengan emoji mengenai cinta atau makeup.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente analizuojame emodžių naudojimą social in ėje žiniasklaidoje lyties ir odos tono atžvilgiu. Rinkant daugiau kaip dvidešimt dviejų milijonų duomenų rinkinį iš Jungtinių Valstijų, kai kurios išvados aiškiai pabrėžiamos atlikus paprastą dažniu pagrįstą analizę. Be to, atliekame semantinę emodžių ir jų modifikatorių (pvz., lyties ir odos tono) naudojimo analizę įtraukdami visus žodžius, emodžius ir modifikatorius į tą pačią vektorių erdvę. Mūsų analizės rodo, kad kai kurie su odos spalva ir lytimi susiję stereotipai atspindi šių modifikatorių naudojimą. Pavyzdžiui, rankinius gestus atspindinčios emodžijos dažniau naudojamos lengvesniais odos tonais, o įvairių odos tonų naudojimas labai skiriasi. Tuo pačiu metu vyrų modifikatoriui atitinkantis vektorius paprastai yra semantiškai artimas emodžių, susijusių su verslu ar technologija, o jų moterų kolegos atrodo artimesnės emodžių dėl meilės ar makeup.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник ја анализираме употребата на емоџии во социјалните медиуми во однос на полот и тонот на кожата. Со собирање на податоци од повеќе од дваесет милиони твитови од САД, некои откритија се јасно истакнати по спроведувањето едноставна анализа базирана на фреквенција. Покрај тоа, спроведуваме семантична анализа за употребата на емоџии и нивните модификатори (на пример пол и тон на кожата) со вклучување на сите зборови, емоџии и модификатори во истиот векторен простор. Нашите анализи откриваат дека некои стереотипи поврзани со бојата на кожата и полот се чини дека се рефлектираат на употребата на овие модификатори. На пример, емоџиите кои ги претставуваат рачните гести се пошироко употребени со полесни кожни тони, а употребата низ кожните тони значително се разликува. Истовремено, векторот кој одговара на машкиот модификатор има тенденција да биде семантично блиску до емоџиите поврзани со бизнисот или технологијата, додека нивните женски колеги се појавуваат поблиску до емоџиите за љубовта или мајкепот.', 'no': 'I denne papiret analyserer vi bruken av emojis i sosiale media med hensyn til seks og tematone. Ved å samla eit dataset med over to millioner tweet frå USA, er nokre oppdagingar klart markert etter å utføra ein enkel frekvensbasert analyse. I tillegg gjer vi eit semantisk analyse om bruken av emojis og endringar sine (f.eks. seks og tematone) ved å innebøyra all e ord, emojis og endringar i same vektorplass. Analysene våre viser at noen stereotypar som er relaterte til temafargen og seks ser ut til å bli reflektert på bruken av desse endringane. Eksempel på bruk av emosjer som representerer håndgester er meir lettere med lysare tematoner, og bruken over tematoner er signifikant forskjellig. Samtidig er vektoren som tilsvarar menneske endringar tendenser til å vera semantisk nær emojis som er relatert til forretningar eller teknologi, mens kvinne-trekantane sine syner nærare til emojis om kjærlighet eller oppskap.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид нийгмийн мэдээллийн хувьд гендер, арьсны дуу холбоотой эмойзүүдийн хэрэглээ шинжилгээ хийдэг. АНУ-аас 20 сая гаруй tweets хийсэн өгөгдлийн сангуудыг цуглуулаад зарим ололтууд энгийн давхар судалгааны дараа тодорхой тодорхойлдог. Мөн бид эможи болон өөрчлөгчдийн хэрэглээ (жишээ нь генс болон арьсны тоо) бүх үг, эможи болон өөрчлөгчдийг ижил вектор зайд оруулж, семантик шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бидний шинжилгээний судалгаагаар арьсны өнгөтэй, гендертэй холбоотой зарим стереотип нь эдгээр өөрчлөгчийн хэрэглээнд харагдаж байна. Жишээлбэл, гар хөдөлгөөнтэй эмози илүү хурдан арьсны утастай хэрэглэгддэг бөгөөд арьсны утасны хэрэглээ илүү чухал ялгаатай. Гэвч тэдний эмэгтэйчүүд хайр хайр, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн эмойчүүдтэй холбогдсон эмойчүүдтэй холбогддог.', 'pl': 'W artykule analizujemy wykorzystanie emoji w mediach społecznościowych pod kątem płci i koloru skóry. Zbierając zbiór danych składający się z ponad dwudziestu dwóch milionów tweetów ze Stanów Zjednoczonych, niektóre ustalenia są wyraźnie podkreślone po przeprowadzeniu prostej analizy opartej na częstotliwości. Ponadto przeprowadzamy analizę semantyczną wykorzystania emoji i ich modyfikatorów (np. płci i koloru skóry) poprzez osadzenie wszystkich słów, emoji i modyfikatorów w tej samej przestrzeni wektorowej. Nasze analizy wykazują, że pewne stereotypy związane z kolorem skóry i płcią wydają się być odzwierciedlone na stosowaniu tych modyfikatorów. Na przykład emoji reprezentujące gesty dłoni są szerzej stosowane w jaśniejszych odcieniach skóry, a stosowanie w odcieniach skóry znacznie się różni. Jednocześnie wektor odpowiadający męskiemu modyfikatorowi jest semantycznie zbliżony do emoji związanych z biznesem lub technologią, podczas gdy ich kobiece odpowiedniki wydają się bliżej emoji o miłości lub makijażu.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare analizăm utilizarea emojiurilor în rețelele sociale în ceea ce privește genul și tonul pielii. Prin colectarea unui set de date de peste douăzeci și două de milioane de tweet-uri din Statele Unite, unele constatări sunt evidențiate clar după efectuarea unei simple analize bazate pe frecvență. Mai mult decât atât, efectuăm o analiză semantică a utilizării emojilor și a modificatorilor acestora (de exemplu genul și tonul pielii) prin încorporarea tuturor cuvintelor, emojilor și modificatorilor în același spațiu vectorial. Analizele noastre arată că unele stereotipuri legate de culoarea pielii și sexul par să se reflecte asupra utilizării acestor modificatori. De exemplu, emojiurile care reprezintă gesturile mâinii sunt utilizate mai mult cu tonuri mai deschise ale pielii, iar utilizarea în toate tonurile pielii diferă semnificativ. În același timp, vectorul corespunzător modificatorului masculin tinde să fie semantic aproape de emojis legate de afaceri sau tehnologie, în timp ce omologii lor feminine apar mai aproape de emojis despre dragoste sau machiaj.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru analiziramo korištenje emoja u društvenim medijima u odnosu na spol i kožni ton. Skupljanjem podataka sa preko dvadeset miliona tweeta iz Sjedinjenih Država, neki nalazi su jasno istaknuti nakon provedbe jednostavne analize na frekvenciji. Osim toga, provodimo semantičku analizu o korištenju emoja i njihovih modifikatora (npr. spol i kožni ton) uključujući sve reči, emoje i modifikatore u isto prostor vektora. Naši analizi otkrivaju da su neki stereotipi povezani sa bojom kože i spolom odraženi na upotrebu ovih modifikatora. Na primer, emoji koji predstavljaju geste ruke su šire korišteni lakšim tonovima kože, a korištenje preko tonova kože se značajno razlikuje. U isto vreme, vektor koji odgovara muškom modifikatoru tendencija je semantički blizu emojima vezanih za biznis ili tehnologiju, dok se njihovi ženski kolege pojavljuju bliže emojima o ljubavi ili šminku.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයේ emoji භාවිතා විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ජෙන්ඩර් සහ ස්පත් ටෝන් ගැන. ඇමරිකානු ජාතිකාවෙන් දත්ත සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණයක් පස්සේ සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරපු පස්සේ සිද්ධ ව එතකොට, අපි හැම වචනය, emoji සහ ඔවුන්ගේ වෙක්ටර් අවස්ථානයේ භාවිතාව සඳහා සැමැන්තික විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරන්නේ. අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා ස්පත් වර්ණය සහ ජෙන්ඩර් වර්ණය සමග සම්බන්ධ විදියට මේ වෙනස් කරුණාකර උදාහරණය වෙනුවෙන්, එමෝජිස් වලින් අත් වැඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේම ලයිටර් ස්කින් ටෝන් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ක එකම වෙලාවෙන්, පුරුදු වෙනස්කරුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙක්ටර් එක්ක පුළුවන් විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළ', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku baaraynaa isticmaalka emojiska ee shabakadda bulshada ee ku saabsan jinsiga iyo dabka haragga. Inta lagu soo ururiyo sawirada labaatan milyan oo twitter ka badan Mareykanka waxaa si cad looga caddeeyaa baaritaanka fudud. Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa baaritaanka kaleemeysiga isticmaalka emojiska iyo isbeddelyaashooda (tusaale ahaan jinsiga iyo toneka haragga) oo ku qoraya hadal oo dhan, emojis iyo isbedbedelka isku meel ah. Baaritaankeenna waxay muuqataa in qaar ka mid ah isticmaalka isbedelka midabka iyo jinsiga la xiriira. Tusaale ahaan emojis oo ka muuqata qalabka gacanta waxaa si badan looga isticmaalaa dareemaha fudud oo haragga, isticmaalka dareemaha jidhkana waxaa si weyn u kala duwan. At the same time, the vector corresponding to the male modifier tends to be semantically close to emojis related to business or technology, whereas their female counterparts appear closer to emojis about love or makeup.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats analyserar vi användningen av emojis i sociala medier med avseende på kön och hudton. Genom att samla in en datauppsättning på över tjugotvå miljoner tweets från USA belyses vissa resultat tydligt efter att ha utfört en enkel frekvensbaserad analys. Dessutom genomför vi en semantisk analys av användningen av emojis och deras modifierare (t.ex. kön och hudton) genom att bädda in alla ord, emojis och modifierare i samma vektorutrymme. Våra analyser visar att vissa stereotyper relaterade till hudfärg och kön tycks återspeglas i användningen av dessa modifierare. Exempelvis används emojis som representerar handgester mer allmänt med ljusare hudtoner, och användningen mellan hudtoner skiljer sig avsevärt. Samtidigt tenderar vektorn som motsvarar den manliga modifieraren att vara semantiskt nära emojis relaterade till affärer eller teknik, medan deras kvinnliga motsvarigheter visas närmare emojis om kärlek eller makeup.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں جنس اور پوستی ٹون کے معاملہ میں emojis کا استعمال تحقیق کرتے ہیں۔ ایالات متحدہ سے بیس میلیون ٹیوٹ کے ذریعے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ جمع کرنے کے ذریعہ ایک ساده فرکانسی بنیادی تحلیل کرنے کے بعد کچھ نتیجے واضح تعلیم کیے جاتے ہیں. اور ہم emojis اور ان کے بدلنے والے (جیسی جنس اور پوستی ٹون) کے بارے میں ایک سیمنٹی تحلیل کریں گے۔ تمام کلمات، emojis اور بدلنے والوں کو ایک ہی ویکتور فضا میں داخل کریں گے۔ ہماری تحقیقات ظاہر کرتی ہے کہ کھالی رنگ اور جنس کے معاملہ میں بعض استریوٹائیپ ان متغیروں کے استعمال پر تفسیر کیا جاتا ہے۔ مثال یہ ہے کہ ہاتھ کے جسموں کی نمایش کرنے والی emojis بہت زیادہ ہلکا پوست ٹونوں سے استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں، اور پوست کے ٹونوں پر استعمال اضافہ ہوتا ہے۔ اسی طرح، مردوں کی تغییر کرنے والی ویکتور کے معاملہ میں سیمنٹی طور پر تجارت یا تکنولوژی کے معاملہ میں موجود ہوتا ہے، حالانکہ ان کی عورتوں کے ساتھی محبت یا مکرات کے بارے میں emojis سے زیادہ قریب ظاہر ہوتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் பெண்கள் மற்றும் தோல் தொனியை பற்றி உணர்வு பயன்படுத்துவதை பார்த்துக் கொள்கிறோம். சில கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் ஒரு சுலபமான frequency- அடிப்படையான ஆய்வு செய்யும் பிறகு வெளிப்படையாக குறிப்பிடப்படுகிறது. மேலும், நாம் உணர்ச்சி மற்றும் மாற்றிகள் பயன்பாட்டின் மீது ஒரு பெரும்பான ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம் அதே வெக்டார் இடைவெளியில் உள்ள அனைத்து வார்த்த எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சிகள் தோல் வண்ணம் மற்றும் பெண்களுடன் தொடர்புடைய சில தோற்றங்கள் இந்த மாற்றிகள் பயன்பாட்டில் பிரதிபலிக எடுத்துக்காட்டாக, இம்ஜி கையை குறிப்பிடும் கையில் குறிப்பிடும் சிறிய தோல் தொனிகள் மூலம் அதிகமாக பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, த அதே நேரத்தில், ஆண் மாற்றுபவருக்கு பொருத்தமான நெறிக்காட்டு பாதிக்கு அருகில் இருக்கும் உணர்வு வணிக அல்லது தொழில்நுட்பத்துடன் இருக்கும், ஆனால் பெண', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nagħmlu analiżi tal-użu tal-emoji fil-midja soċjali fir-rigward tas-sess u t-ton tal-ġilda. Billi jinġabar sett ta’ dejta ta’ aktar minn għoxrin miljun tweet mill-Istati Uniti xi sejbiet huma enfasizzati b’mod ċar wara li ssir analiżi sempliċi bbażata fuq il-frekwenza. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu analiżi semantika dwar l-użu tal-emoji u l-modifikaturi tagħhom (pereżempju sess u ton tal-ġilda) billi ninkorporaw il-kliem, l-emoji u l-modifikaturi kollha fl-istess spazju tal-vetturi. L-analiżi tagħna turi li xi stereotipi relatati mal-kulur tal-ġilda u s-sess jidhru li huma riflessi fuq l-użu ta’ dawn il-modifikaturi. For example, emojis representing hand gestures are more widely utilized with lighter skin tones, and the usage across skin tones differs significantly.  Fl-istess ħin, il-vettur li jikkorrispondi għall-modifikatur irġiel għandu t-tendenza li jkun semantikament qrib emoji relatati man-negozju jew it-teknoloġija, filwaqt li l-kontropartijiet nisa tagħhom jidhru qrib emoji dwar l-imħabba jew il-makeup.', 'uz': "Bu takarda biz jamiyatli medyaya emojis foydalanuvchisini jinsiya va huddi tovushlari bilan taʼlumot qilamiz. AQSHdan ikki minglab milliondan foydalanuvchi xabarlarni olib tashlash orqali bir necha narsalar frekvens asosiy analytikini bajargandan keyin ko'rsatiladi. Biz hamma so'zlar, emojis va o'zgarishlarning foydalanishi (m. jinsi va huddi tovushlari) bilan hamma so'zlar, emojis va o'zgarishlarni bir vaqtga qo'yish mumkin. Analysimiz huddi huddi rang va jinsiyagi haqida bog'liq stereotyplar bu o'zgarishlarning foydalanishiga ko'rinadi. Masalan, emojis qo'l gesturlarini ko'proq ishlatiladi va huddi tovushlari bilan foydalanish juda katta ajratilgan. Va shu paytda, vektor o'zgarishga qisqa o'zgarishga ega bo'lgan эркагу o'zgarishga o'xshash o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi, lekin ularning ayol kompyuterlari javob yoki tug'ilotning haqida emojisi ko'rib turadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi phân tích biểu tượng trong truyền thông xã hội về giới tính và màu da. Bằng cách thu thập dữ liệu trên hai mươi triệu tweet từ Mỹ một số dữ liệu được đánh dấu rõ ràng sau khi thực hiện một phân tích tần số đơn giản. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi phân tích theo ngữ nghĩa về cách sử dụng biểu tượng và cách điều khiển của chúng (v. d. giới tính và màu da) bằng cách trộn mọi từ, biểu tượng và điều khiển vào cùng một không gian vector. Phân tích của chúng tôi tiết lộ rằng một số mẫu rập khuôn liên quan đến màu da và giới tính có vẻ được phản ánh trên việc dùng những thay đổi này. Thí dụ như, biểu tượng biểu tượng hành động bàn tay được sử dụng rộng hơn với sắc màu da nhẹ hơn, và cách sử dụng sắc màu da khác biệt đáng kể. Đồng thời, véc- tơ tương ứng với tính cách thay đổi nam có xu hướng theo ngữ pháp gần với biểu tượng về công nghệ hay công nghệ, trong khi các đối tác nữ của họ có vẻ gần gũi với biểu tượng về tình yêu hay trang điểm.', 'nl': "In dit artikel analyseren we het gebruik van emoji's in sociale media met betrekking tot geslacht en huidskleur. Door het verzamelen van een dataset van meer dan tweeëntwintig miljoen tweets uit de Verenigde Staten worden enkele bevindingen duidelijk benadrukt na het uitvoeren van een eenvoudige frequentie-gebaseerde analyse. Daarnaast voeren we een semantische analyse uit van het gebruik van emoji's en hun modifiers (bv. geslacht en huidskleur) door alle woorden, emoji's en modifiers in dezelfde vectorruimte te integreren. Onze analyses tonen aan dat sommige stereotypen gerelateerd aan de huidskleur en het geslacht lijken te worden weerspiegeld op het gebruik van deze modifiers. Emoji's die handgebaren vertegenwoordigen, worden bijvoorbeeld vaker gebruikt bij lichtere huidtinten en het gebruik tussen huidtinten verschilt aanzienlijk. Tegelijkertijd lijkt de vector die overeenkomt met de mannelijke modifier semantisch dicht bij emoji's gerelateerd aan zaken of technologie, terwijl hun vrouwelijke tegenhangers dichter bij emoji's over liefde of make-up lijken.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия анализираме използването на емоджи в социалните медии по отношение на пола и тонуса на кожата. Чрез събирането на набор от данни от над двадесет и два милиона туитове от САЩ някои констатации са ясно подчертани след извършване на прост честотен анализ. Освен това, извършваме семантичен анализ на използването на емоджи и техните модификатори (например пол и тон на кожата), като вграждаме всички думи, емоджи и модификатори в едно и също векторно пространство. Нашите анализи показват, че някои стереотипи, свързани с цвета на кожата и пола, изглежда се отразяват върху използването на тези модификатори. Например емотиконите, представляващи жестове на ръце, се използват по-широко с по-светли тонове на кожата, а използването в различните тонове на кожата се различава значително. В същото време векторът, съответстващ на мъжкия модификатор, е склонен да бъде семантично близък до емотиконите, свързани с бизнеса или технологиите, докато техните женски колеги изглеждат по-близо до емотиконите за любов или грим.', 'da': 'I denne artikel analyserer vi brugen af emojis i sociale medier med hensyn til køn og hudtone. Ved at indsamle et datasæt på over 22 millioner tweets fra USA fremhæves nogle resultater tydeligt efter en simpel frekvensbaseret analyse. Desuden foretager vi en semantisk analyse af brugen af emojis og deres modifikatorer (f.eks. køn og hudtone) ved at integrere alle ord, emojis og modifikatorer i samme vektorrum. Vores analyser afslører, at nogle stereotyper relateret til hudfarve og køn synes at være afspejlet i brugen af disse modifikatorer. For eksempel er emojis, der repræsenterer håndbevægelser mere udbredt med lysere hudtoner, og brugen på tværs af hudtoner varierer betydeligt. Samtidig har vektoren, der svarer til den mandlige modifikator, tendens til at være semantisk tæt på emojis relateret til forretning eller teknologi, mens deres kvindelige modstykker vises tættere på emojis om kærlighed eller makeup.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru analiziramo primjenu emojis u društvenim medijima u odnosu na spol i kožni ton. Skupljanjem podataka sa preko dvadeset milijuna tweeta iz Sjedinjenih Država, neki nalazi su jasno istaknuti nakon provođenja jednostavne analize na temelju učestalosti. Osim toga, provodimo semantičku analizu o korištenju emoja i njihovih modifikatora (npr. spol i kožni ton) uključujući sve riječi, emoje i modifikatore u isto prostor vektora. Naši analizi otkrivaju da su neki stereotipi povezani s bojom kože i spolom odraženi na upotrebu tih modifikatora. Na primjer, emoji koji predstavljaju geste ruke su šire korišteni lakšim tonovima kože, a korištenje preko kože značajno se razlikuje. U isto vrijeme, vektor odgovarajući muškarcima modifikatoru tendencija je semantički blizu emojima povezanih s poslovanjem ili tehnologijom, dok se njihovi ženski kolege pojavljuju bliže emojima o ljubavi ili šminku.', 'id': 'In this paper we analyze the use of emojis in social media with respect to gender and skin tone.  Dengan mengumpulkan dataset dari lebih dari dua puluh dua juta tweet dari Amerika Serikat beberapa penemuan jelas diterangkan setelah melakukan analisis yang sederhana berdasarkan frekuensi. Selain itu, kami melakukan analisis semantis tentang penggunaan emoji dan modifier mereka (misalnya jenis dan nada kulit) dengan memasukkan semua kata, emoji dan modifier ke ruang vektor yang sama. Analisi kami mengungkapkan bahwa beberapa stereotipe yang berhubungan dengan warna kulit dan jenis tampaknya refleksi pada penggunaan modifier ini. For example, emojis representing hand gestures are more widely utilized with lighter skin tones, and the usage across skin tones differs significantly.  Pada saat yang sama, vektor yang cocok dengan pemodifikasi laki-laki cenderung secara semantis dekat dengan emoji yang berhubungan dengan bisnis atau teknologi, sementara rekan-rekan wanita mereka tampak lebih dekat dengan emoji tentang cinta atau makeup.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag analysieren wir die Verwendung von Emojis in sozialen Medien hinsichtlich Geschlecht und Hautton. Durch die Sammlung eines Datensatzes von über zweiundzwanzig Millionen Tweets aus den USA werden einige Ergebnisse nach einer einfachen frequenzbasierten Analyse deutlich hervorgehoben. Darüber hinaus führen wir eine semantische Analyse der Verwendung von Emojis und deren Modifikatoren (z.B. Geschlecht und Hautton) durch, indem wir alle Wörter, Emojis und Modifikatoren in den gleichen Vektorraum einbetten. Unsere Analysen zeigen, dass einige Stereotypen in Bezug auf Hautfarbe und Geschlecht auf die Verwendung dieser Modifikatoren reflektiert werden scheinen. Zum Beispiel werden Emojis, die Handgesten darstellen, häufiger mit helleren Hauttönen verwendet, und die Verwendung zwischen Hauttönen unterscheidet sich erheblich. Gleichzeitig neigt der Vektor, der dem männlichen Modifikator entspricht, semantisch nah an Emojis zu sein, die mit Geschäft oder Technologie zusammenhängen, während ihre weiblichen Pendants eher Emojis über Liebe oder Make-up erscheinen.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 소셜 미디어에서 이모티콘이 성별과 피부색에 사용되는 것을 분석했다.미국에서 2200만 건이 넘는 트윗을 수집한 데이터 집합을 통해 주파수 기반의 간단한 분석을 실시한 결과 일부 발견은 명확하게 강조되었다.또한 우리는 모든 단어, 표정과 수식어를 같은 벡터 공간에 끼워 넣고 표정과 수식어(예를 들어 성별과 피부색)의 사용에 대해 의미 분석을 한다.우리의 분석에 의하면 피부색과 성별과 관련된 판에 박힌 인상이 이런 수식어의 사용에 반영된 것 같다.예를 들어 제스처를 대표하는 이모티콘은 피부색이 옅은 상태에서 더욱 광범위하게 사용되고 피부색에 따라 현저한 차이가 있다.또한 남성 수식어에 대응하는 벡터는 의미상 상업이나 기술과 관련된 이모티콘에 가깝고 여성 수식어는 사랑이나 화장에 관한 이모티콘에 가깝다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunachambua matumizi ya hisia katika mitandao ya kijamii kuhusu sauti za kijinsia na ngono. Kwa kukusanya seti ya taarifa ya twiti milioni ishirini na mbili kutoka Marekani baadhi ya mambo yanaonyesha wazi baada ya kufanya uchambuzi rahisi wa umeme. Zaidi ya hayo, tunafanya uchambuzi wa kimapenzi kuhusu matumizi ya emojis na mabadiliko yao (kama vile jinsia na sauti za ngono) kwa kuingiza maneno yote, hisia na mabadiliko katika nafasi hiyo. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kuwa baadhi ya maadili yanayohusiana na rangi ya ngono na jinsia zinaonekana kutafakari matumizi ya mabadiliko haya. Kwa mfano, emojis anayewakilisha vifaa vya mikono vinatumiwa sana kwa sauti nyepesi za ngozi, na matumizi ya viwanja vya ngozi yanatofautiana sana. At the same time, the vector corresponding to the male modifier tends to be semantically close to emojis related to business or technology, whereas their female counterparts appear closer to emojis about love or makeup.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما استفاده از emojis در رسانه های اجتماعی با احترام جنسی و صدای پوست را تحلیل می کنیم. با جمع کردن مجموعه داده\u200cهای بیش از ۲۰ میلیون تویت از ایالات متحده بعضی از نتیجه\u200cها بعد از تحلیل\u200cهای فرکانس ساده\u200cای روشن شده\u200cاند. به علاوه، ما یک تحلیل semantic در مورد استفاده از emojis و تغییردهندگان آنها (مثل جنس و صدای پوستشان) را با جمع کردن تمام کلمات، emojis و تغییردهندگان در یک فضا ویکتور انجام می\u200cدهیم. تحلیل\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که بعضی از استریوتیپ\u200cهای مربوط به رنگ پوست و جنسی به نظر می\u200cرسد که بر استفاده از این تغییرگران تغییر داده می\u200cشوند. برای مثال، احساسات که نشان می\u200cدهند حرکت\u200cهای دست بیشتر با صدای پوستی سبک\u200cتر استفاده می\u200cشوند، و استفاده از صدای پوستی به طور معنی تفاوت می\u200cکند. در همین زمان، ویکتور مربوط به تغییر دهنده مرد معمولاً به احساسات مربوط به تجارت یا تکنولوژی نزدیک می\u200cشود، در حالی که همکاران زنانشان به احساسات درباره عشق و آفرینش نزدیک می\u200cشوند.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne analizojmë përdorimin e emoxhisë në mediat shoqërore lidhur me gjinin dhe tonin e lëkurës. Duke mbledhur një grup të dhënash prej mbi njëzet e dy milion tweets nga Shtetet e Bashkuara disa gjetje janë theksuar qartë pas kryerjes së një analize të thjeshtë bazuar në frekuencë. Moreover, we carry out a semantic analysis on the usage of emojis and their modifiers (e.g. gender and skin tone) by embedding all words, emojis and modifiers into the same vector space.  Analizat tona tregojnë se disa stereotipe lidhur me ngjyrën e lëkurës dhe gjininë duken të pasqyrohen në përdorimin e këtyre modifikatorëve. For example, emojis representing hand gestures are more widely utilized with lighter skin tones, and the usage across skin tones differs significantly.  Në të njëjtën kohë, vektori që korrespondon me modifikuesin mashkull ka tendencë të jetë semantikisht pranë emoxheve të lidhura me biznesin apo teknologjinë, ndërsa homologët e tyre femër duken më pranë emoxheve rreth dashurisë apo makiage.', 'tr': 'Bu kağıtda cinsel ve dert tonu ile ilgili sosyal medyelerde emojislerin kullanılmasını çözeriz. Birleşik Devletlerden ýigrimi milyon tweet sanyny ýygnap otyrsak, birnäçe netijeler birnäçe basit frekanslardan daşary çözümlerden soňra aydınlaşýar. Ayrıca, emojislerin ve değiştiricilerinin kullanımı üzerinde semantik analizi yaptık. Bizim analyzlarymyz deri renki ve cinsiýa ile ilgili bazı stereotipler, bu düzenleyicilerin kullanımına göz görünüyor. Örneğin, el gesteleri gösteren emojisler daha çok kolay değerli deri tonlarla kullanılır ve deri tonlarla kullanılması önemli bir değerdir. Aynı zamanda erkek düzenleyici ile ilgili vektör, iş ya da teknoloji ile ilgili emojis gibi yaklaşır ve kadın eşleri aşk ya da makyaj hakkında emojis ile yaklaşır.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքում մենք վերլուծում ենք էմոջայի օգտագործումը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում գենդերային և մաշկի տոնի առումով: By gathering a dataset of over twenty two million tweets from United States some findings are clearly highlighted after performing a simple frequency-based analysis.  Ավելին, մենք կատարում ենք սեմանտիկ վերլուծություն էմոջայի և նրանց մոդիֆիտորների օգտագործման մասին (օրինակ սեռը և մաշկի տոնը) ներառելով բոլոր բառերը, էմոջայի և մոդիֆիտորները նույն վեկտոր տարածքում: Մեր վերլուծությունները բացահայտում են, որ որոշ կարծրատիպեր, որոնք կապված են մաշկի գույնով և գենդերով, կարծես արտացոլում են այս փոփոխիչների օգտագործման վրա: For example, emojis representing hand gestures are more widely utilized with lighter skin tones, and the usage across skin tones differs significantly.  Միևնույն ժամանակ, տղամարդու մոդուցիոն վեկտորը սովորաբար սեմանտիկապես մոտ է բիզնեսի կամ տեխնոլոգիայի հետ կապված էմոյեյներին, մինչդեռ նրանց կին համագործակիցները ավելի մոտ են սիրո կամ կազմակերպման մասին էմոյեյներին:', 'af': "In hierdie papier analyseer ons die gebruik van emojies in sosiale media met betrekking na geneem en vel tone. Deur die versamel van 'n datastel van meer twee miljoen tweet van die Vereenigde State, word sommige gevindings duidelik verlig na die uitvoer van 'n eenvoudige frekwensiegebaseerde analisie. Ook, ons uitvoer 'n semantiese analiseer op die gebruik van emojis en hulle modifiseerders (bv. gender en vel tone) deur all e woorde, emojis en modifiseerders in dieselfde vektorruimte te binne. Ons analiseerdes vertoon dat sommige stereotipes verwante met die vel kleur en gender lyk reflekteer word op die gebruik van hierdie verander. Byvoorbeeld, emojies wat die hand gesture verteenwoordig word meer vaste gebruik met ligter vel tone, en die gebruik oor vel tone is betekeurig verskillende. Op dieselfde tyd, die vektor wat ooreenstemmende aan die manlik verander is, is tendens om semantiese naby te wees aan emojies wat verwanter is met besigheid of teknologie, terwyl hulle vroue kunstenaars naby aan emojies oor liefde of maak.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ የኢሜጂን ጥያቄ በማኅበራዊ አውታር ላይ በሴሰኝነት እና በቁርበት ድምፅ እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ ከአሜሪካ ሀያ ሁለት ሚሊዮን ላይ የተጨማሪውን የዳታተር ትዊት በመሰብሰብ አንዳንዶቹ የፍሬዛዊ ግንኙነት በተደረገ ጊዜ ግልፅ ነው፡፡ ደግሞም የኢሜጂ እና ለውጦቻቸውን (ለምሳሌ የሴት እና የቁርበ ድምፅ) በመጠቀም ላይ የsemantic analysis እናደርጋለን፡፡ analyzes some stereotypes with skin color and gender related to the use of these modifiers ይመስላል፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ ኢሜጂ እጁን ማሳየት በቁርበቱ ድምፅ የሚጠቀሙት እጃዎች ይጨመርበታል፤ በቁርበቱም ድምጽ ላይ የሚጠቀሙት ትልቅ ነው። በዚያው ሰዓት፣ የሴቶቻቸው ተቃዋሚዎች ስለ ፍቅር ወይም ማሳየት አካባቢ የኢሜጂ እና ቴክኖጂ ተቃራኒ ይደርሳሉ፡፡', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সামাজিক মিডিয়াতে ইমোজিক ব্যবহার বিশ্লেষণ করি যে লিঙ্গ এবং চামড়া টোনের প্রতি শ্রদ্ধা করে। মার্কিন যুক্তরাষ্ট্র থেকে ২০ মিলিয়ন টুইটের বেশি তথ্য সংগ্রহ করার মাধ্যমে সাধারণ ফ্রাইভেন্স ভিত্তিক বিশ্লেষণের পর কি এছাড়াও, আমরা ইমোজিক এবং তাদের পরিবর্তনের (যেমন লিঙ্গ এবং চামড়ার টন) ব্যবহারের ব্যাবহারে সেমেন্টিক বিশ্লেষণ করি একই ভেক্টরের স্থানে প্রবেশ করে। আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ প্রকাশ করে যে চামড়ার রং এবং লিঙ্গের সাথে যুক্ত কিছু স্টিরিয়োটাইপের ব্যবহারের উপর প্রতিফলিত হয়। উদাহরণস্বরূপ, ইমোজিক হাতের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হাতের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে হালকা টোন দিয়ে আরো ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে এবং তালিকা একই সাথে পুরুষ পরিবর্তনের সাথে যুক্ত ভেক্টর মনে হচ্ছে ব্যবসা বা প্রযুক্তির সাথে যুক্ত ইমোজির কাছে যুক্ত, কিন্তু তাদের নারীর প্রতিপক্ষ প্রেম ব', 'ca': "En aquest article analitzem l'ús d'emoji als mitjans socials en relació amb el gènere i el ton de la pell. Recollint un conjunt de dades de més de vint i dos milions de tweets dels Estats Units, alguns descobriments es destaquen clarament després de fer una anàlisi simple basada en freqüències. A més, fem una anàlisi semàntica sobre l'ús dels emoji i els seus modificadors (per exemple, g ènere i ton de pell) incorporant totes les paraules, emoji i modificadors al mateix espai vector. Les nostres anàlisis revelen que alguns estereotips relacionats amb el color de la pell i el gènere semblen reflexionats en l'ús d'aquests modificadors. Per exemple, els emoji que representen gestos de mà s'utilitzen més ampliament amb tons de pell més lleugers, i l'ús a través de tons de pell difere significativament. At the same time, the vector corresponding to the male modifier tends to be semantically close to emojis related to business or technology, whereas their female counterparts appear closer to emojis about love or makeup.", 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪtda, cins v…ô d…ôri tonu il…ô sosyal media i√ßind…ô emoji istifad…ôsini analiz edirik. Birl…ôŇüik Devletl…ôrd…ôn 20 milyon twet √ľst√ľnd…ô veril…ôn bir quruluŇü toplayaraq, b…ôzi m…ôlumatlar basit frekans analizi etdikd…ôn sonra a √ßńĪq-aydńĪn iŇüńĪqlandńĪrńĪlńĪr. Daha sonra, emoji v…ô d…ôyiŇüdiricil…ôrin istifad…ôsi bar…ôsind…ô, b√ľt√ľn s√∂zl…ôri, emoji v…ô d…ôyiŇüdiricil…ôri eyni vektor alanńĪna qoyub, semantik analizi √ß…ôkirik. Bizim analizimiz d…ôri r…ôngli v…ô cinsiyy…ôtli stereotipl…ôrin bu d…ôyiŇüdiricil…ôrin istifad…ôsind…ô t…ôsirli g√∂r√ľn√ľr. Misal olaraq, …ôl gestil…ôrini g√∂st…ôr…ôn emoji daha y√ľng√ľl d…ôri tonlarla istifad…ô edilir v…ô d…ôri tonlarńĪn arasńĪnda istifad…ô edilm…ôsi m√∂vcuddur. AynńĪ zamanda, erk…ôk d…ôyiŇüdiricisin…ô uyńüun vekt√∂r biznis v…ô teknolojiy…ô bańülńĪ emoji il…ô semantik olar. Halbuki qadńĪn yoldaŇülarńĪ sevgi v…ô makyaj haqqńĪnda emoji haqqńĪnda daha yaxńĪn g√∂r√ľn√ľr.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös analüüsime emojide kasutamist sotsiaalmeedias seoses soo ja nahatooniga. Üle kahekümne kahe miljoni säutsu andmekogumi kogumisega Ameerika Ühendriikidest tuuakse mõned tulemused selgelt esile pärast lihtsat sagedusel põhinevat analüüsi. Lisaks teostame semantilise analüüsi emojide ja nende modifikaatorite (nt sugu ja nahatoon) kasutamise kohta, integreerides kõik sõnad, emojid ja modifikaatorid samasse vektoriruumi. Meie analüüsid näitavad, et mõned nahavärvi ja sooga seotud stereotüübid näivad peegelduvat nende modifikaatorite kasutamisel. Näiteks kasutatakse käte žeste esindavaid emojisid laiemalt heledamate nahatoonidega ning kasutamine erineb märkimisväärselt nahatoonide vahel. Samal ajal kipub meesmoodukaatorile vastav vektor olema semantiliselt lähedane äri või tehnoloogiaga seotud emojidele, samas kui nende naissoost kolleegid tunduvad armastuse või meiki emojidele lähemal.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru analiziramo korištenje emojis u društvenim medijima u odnosu na spol i kožni ton. Skupljanjem podataka sa preko dvadeset miliona tweeta iz Sjedinjenih Država, neki nalazi su jasno osvjetljeni nakon provođenja jednostavne analize na temelju frekvencije. Osim toga, provodimo semantičku analizu o korištenju emoja i njihovih modifikatora (npr. spol i kožni ton) uključujući sve riječi, emoje i modifikatore u isto prostor vektora. Naši analizi otkrivaju da su neki stereotipi povezani sa bojom kože i spolom odraženi na upotrebu ovih modifikatora. Na primjer, emoji koji predstavljaju geste ruke su šire korišteni lakšim tonima kože, a korištenje preko kože se značajno razlikuje. U isto vrijeme, vektor koji odgovara muškom modifikatoru tendencija je semantički blizu emojima povezanih sa poslovanjem ili tehnologijom, dok se njihovi ženski kolege pojavljuju bliže emojima o ljubavi ili šminku.', 'fi': 'T채ss채 artikkelissa analysoimme hymi철iden k채ytt철채 sosiaalisessa mediassa sukupuolen ja ihonv채rin suhteen. Ker채채m채ll채 yli 22 miljoonan tweetin datajoukon Yhdysvalloista jotkin l철yd철kset korostuvat selv채sti yksinkertaisen taajuusanalyysin j채lkeen. Lis채ksi teemme semanttisen analyysin emojien ja niiden muokkaajien k채yt철st채 (esim. sukupuoli ja ihonv채ri) upottamalla kaikki sanat, emojit ja muokkaajat samaan vektoriavaruuteen. Analyysimme osoittavat, ett채 jotkut ihonv채riin ja sukupuoleen liittyv채t stereotypiat n채ytt채v채t heijastuvan n채iden modifiointien k채ytt철철n. Esimerkiksi k채sieleit채 esitt채vi채 hymi철it채 k채ytet채채n laajemmin vaaleammilla ihons채vyill채, ja k채ytt철 eri ihons채vyiss채 vaihtelee huomattavasti. Samaan aikaan miespuolista modifiointia vastaava vektori on semanttisesti l채hell채 liiketoimintaan tai teknologiaan liittyvi채 emojija, kun taas heid채n naispuoliset vastineensa n채ytt채v채t olevan l채hemp채n채 rakkautta tai meikki채 koskevia emojija.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku analyzujeme použití emoji v sociálních médiích s ohledem na pohlaví a odstín pleti. Shromážděním datové sady více než dvacet milionů tweetů ze Spojených států jsou některé zjištění jasně zdůrazněny po provedení jednoduché frekvenčně založené analýzy. Dále provádíme sémantickou analýzu použití emodži a jejich modifikátorů (např. gender a tón pleti) vložením všech slov, emodži a modifikátorů do stejného vektorového prostoru. Naše analýzy ukazují, že některé stereotypy týkající se barvy kůže a pohlaví se zdají reflektovat na použití těchto modifikátorů. Například emoji představující gesta ruky jsou široce využívány u světlejších tónů pleti a použití mezi tóny pleti se výrazně liší. Vektor odpovídající mužskému modifikátoru je současně sémanticky blízký emoji souvisejícím s podnikáním nebo technologií, zatímco jejich ženské protějšky se zdají blíže emoji o lásce nebo make-upu.', 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno éntuk sistem omojit nang media sotiki dadi kaé sewengan lan ujak-ujak. Genjer-genjer beraksi dataset diuntingi podho puluh milion sing tuytis nang Etika Unih. Yukaro ono buking nggawe barang-buking ndelok dhéwé wis dipoleh kaya sistem sing bisa perusahaan sistem sing sampeyan apik dadi. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Panjenenganipun anyar dipoleh menehi penting akeh stereo-type gak penting ing ing winih lan lah dumadhi iki oleh dumadhi kaé nguasai perusahaan iki. user Winih tambah, vector nggo masalah karo perbudhakan liyane mungkin garep diolah', 'sk': 'V prispevku analiziramo uporabo emojijev v družbenih omrežjih glede na spol in ton kože. Z zbiranjem podatkovnega nabora več kot dvaindvajsetih milijonov tweetov iz Združenih držav so nekatere ugotovitve jasno poudarjene po opravljeni enostavni frekvenčni analizi. Poleg tega smo izvedli semantično analizo uporabe emojijev in njihovih modifikatorjev (npr. spol in ton kože) z vključitvijo vseh besed, emojijev in modifikatorjev v isti vektorski prostor. Naše analize kažejo, da se nekateri stereotipi, povezani z barvo kože in spolom, zdijo odražajo pri uporabi teh modifikatorjev. Na primer, emojiji, ki predstavljajo kretnje rok, se bolj pogosto uporabljajo pri svetlejših tonih kože, uporaba med toni kože pa se bistveno razlikuje. Hkrati je vektor, ki ustreza moškemu modifikatorju, semantično blizu emojijev, povezanih s poslovanjem ali tehnologijo, medtem ko se njihovi ženski kolegi zdijo bližje emojijem o ljubezni ali ličenju.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã yin anayya da amfani da jijis a cikin mitandai na jamii game da sautin jini da hudi. Ga ku sama wani danna-set na over 20 millionki biyu daga United Marekani, za'a bayyana wasu gannai bayan a sami wani analai mai sauri a kan fomat. Kayya, za'a sami wani anadi na semanti a cikin amfani da masu amfani da misali da gyare-gyare (misali, sautin jini da haratun) cikin duk kalmõmi, masu shiryi da shiryoyin ayuka zuwa filin hanya guda. Our analyses reveal that some stereotypes related to the skin color and gender seem to be reflected on the use of these modifiers.  Misali, misali, fojis mai nuna gesture na hannuwansa za'a yi amfani da shi mafi sauƙi da tsohon hudu, kuma amfani da kowace tsohon hudai suka sãɓã mai girma. A lokacin da ke daidai da mai gyarawa maza, yana da matsayin mutane na kamfani da ma'abũcin kashi ya fi kusanta a matsayin mutane da ma'abũcin wani abinci ko techni, kuma da kamfanin mace, masu kamfata matansu sun fi kusa su sami mafiya kusa a sami'a masu son son zũciya ko tamko.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་བུད་མེད་དང་པགས་པོའི་ཁོང་གི་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ཨ་རིའི་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཟིན་བྲིས་ས་ཡ་གཉིས་ལས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སེམས་ཚོར་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་ཚོར་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་semantic analysis་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ན། སྐྱེས་བ་དང་པང་ཁེབས་ཀྱི་ཁ་དོག་དག་ ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཁ་དོག་གི་ཁ་དོག དཔེར་ན། emojis་ནི་ལག་འཁོར་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་ལས་ཕལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན དེ་རེས་ཀྱང་། སྐྱེས་ཚོའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་མཁན་དང་མཐུན་པའི་བརྒྱུད་རྐྱེན་པས། རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་བ་དང་ལག་ཁྱེར་དང་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད།', 'he': "In this paper we analyze the use of emojis in social media with respect to gender and skin tone.  על ידי האספת קבוצת נתונים של יותר מ-20 שני מיליון טוויטים מארצות הברית כמה מציאות מודגישות בבירור לאחר ביצוע ניתוח פשוט מבוסס על תדירות. חוץ מזה, אנו מבצעים ניתוח סמנטי על השימוש של אמוג'יס והמודיקטורים שלהם (למשל מין וטון עור) בכך שאנחנו מכניסים את כל המילים, אמוג'יס וממודיקטורים לאותו חלל ווקטור. הניתוחים שלנו מראים שכמה סטריאוטיפים קשורים לצבע העור ומין נראים משקפים על השימוש של המmodifiers האלה. לדוגמה, האמוג'ים המייצגים מחוות יד משתמשים רחב יותר עם טונים עור קלים יותר, והשימוש ברחבי טונים עור שונה משמעותית. באותו הזמן, הווקטור המתאים למונדג'ים הגברים נוטה להיות סמנטית קרוב לאמוג'ים הקשורים לעסקים או טכנולוגיות, בעוד שותפיהם הנשים נראות קרובים לאמוג'ים על אהבה או מייקאפ."}
{'en': 'Learning Patient Representations from Text', 'ar': 'تعلم تمثيلات المريض من النص', 'pt': 'Aprendendo as representações do paciente a partir do texto', 'es': 'Aprender representaciones de pacientes a partir del texto', 'fr': 'Apprentissage des représentations des patients à', 'ja': 'テキストから患者表現を学習する', 'zh': '从文本中学患者表徵', 'hi': 'पाठ से रोगी अभ्यावेदन सीखना', 'ru': 'Изучение представлений пациентов из текста', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Léiriúcháin Othair ón Téacs', 'hu': 'A betegek reprezentációinak tanulása szövegből', 'el': 'Μάθηση αναπαραστάσεων ασθενών από κείμενο', 'ka': 'ტექსტიდან პაციენტის გამოსახულების შესწავლება', 'mk': 'Научи ги претставувањата на пациентот од текстот', 'it': 'Imparare le rappresentazioni dei pazienti dal testo', 'kk': 'Мәтіннен пациенттің таңбаларын үйрену', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-Pazjent mit-Test', 'lt': 'Išmokyti paciento atstovavimus iš teksto', 'ms': 'Belajar Persembahan Pasien dari Teks', 'pl': 'Uczenie się reprezentacji pacjenta z tekstu', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും രോഗിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'sr': 'Naučenje zastupanja pacijenata iz teksta', 'mn': 'Өвчтөн өвчтөн үзүүлэлтийг', 'so': 'Baritaanka macluumaadka bukaanka', 'si': 'පාළුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'ro': 'Învățarea reprezentărilor pacienților din text', 'sv': 'Att lära sig patientrepresentationer från text', 'ta': 'உரையிலிருந்து நோயாளிகள் பிரதிபலிப்புகளை கற்றுக்கொள்கிறது', 'ur': 'پیٹیس سے بیمار نمایش سکھائی جاتی ہے', 'no': 'Læring av pasienterepresentasjonar frå tekst', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Học thuốc kháng sinh từ văn bản', 'nl': 'Vertegenwoordigingen van patiënten leren van tekst', 'da': 'Læring af patientrepræsentationer fra tekst', 'bg': 'Учене на представителства на пациента от текст', 'hr': 'Učiti predstave bolesnika iz teksta', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن نمایش بیماران از متن', 'ko': '텍스트에서 환자 표징을 배우다', 'de': 'Patientenvertretungen aus Text lernen', 'id': 'Belajar Perwakilan Pasien dari Teks', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Mazungumzo ya Wagonjwa kutoka Matambo', 'tr': 'Sabyt Resimlerini Metinden öwrenmek', 'af': 'Leer Patiente voorstellings van Teks', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Հիվանդի ներկայացումներ սովորելը տեքստից', 'sq': 'Mëso përfaqësimet e pacientit nga teksti', 'az': '叉饺楹秉饴⁔즙얟歩污瑬慲쒱滄넠䵥瑩湤즙渠쎶祲즙湭즙權', 'bn': 'টেক্সট থেকে রোগীর প্রতিনিধি শিখা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Naučenje predstavljanja pacijenata iz teksta', 'ca': 'Aprendre representacions del pacient a partir del text', 'cs': 'Učení se zastoupení pacientů z textu', 'et': 'Patsiendi esinduste õppimine tekstist', 'fi': 'Oppiminen potilaan edustuksesta tekstistä', 'jv': 'tips-locale:de', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Učenje predstavnikov bolnikov iz besedila', 'he': 'ללמוד מייצגים של מטופל מהטקסט', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་ནས་སྙུགས་རུས་པ་མཚོན་རྟགས་སློབ་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Mining electronic health records for patients who satisfy a set of predefined criteria is known in medical informatics as phenotyping. Phenotyping has numerous applications such as outcome prediction, clinical trial recruitment, and retrospective studies. Supervised machine learning for phenotyping typically relies on sparse patient representations such as bag-of-words. We consider an alternative that involves learning patient representations. We develop a neural network model for learning patient representations and show that the learned representations are general enough to obtain state-of-the-art performance on a standard comorbidity detection task.', 'ar': 'يُعرف تعدين السجلات الصحية الإلكترونية للمرضى الذين يستوفون مجموعة من المعايير المحددة مسبقًا في المعلوماتية الطبية باسم النمط الظاهري. للنماذج الظاهرية العديد من التطبيقات مثل التنبؤ بالنتائج وتوظيف التجارب السريرية والدراسات بأثر رجعي. يعتمد التعلم الآلي الخاضع للإشراف للنماذج الظاهرية عادةً على تمثيلات المريض المتفرقة مثل كيس الكلمات. نحن نعتبر بديلاً يتضمن تعلم تمثيلات المريض. نحن نطور نموذجًا للشبكة العصبية لتعلم تمثيلات المرضى ونبين أن التمثيلات المكتسبة عامة بما يكفي للحصول على أداء متطور في مهمة قياسية لاكتشاف الاعتلال المشترك.', 'fr': "L'exploration des dossiers médicaux électroniques pour les patients qui répondent à un ensemble de critères prédéfinis est connue en informatique médicale sous le nom de phénotypage. Le phénotypage a de nombreuses applications telles que la prédiction des résultats, le recrutement d'essais cliniques et les études rétrospectives. L'apprentissage automatique supervisé pour le phénotypage repose généralement sur des représentations rares du patient, telles que des sacs de mots. Nous envisageons une alternative qui implique l'apprentissage des représentations des patients. Nous développons un modèle de réseau neuronal pour l'apprentissage des représentations des patients et montrons que les représentations apprises sont suffisamment générales pour obtenir des performances de pointe sur une tâche standard de détection de comorbidité.", 'es': 'La extracción de registros médicos electrónicos para pacientes que satisfacen un conjunto de criterios predefinidos se conoce en informática médica como fenotipado. El fenotipado tiene numerosas aplicaciones, como la predicción de resultados, el reclutamiento de ensayos clínicos y los estudios retrospectivos. El aprendizaje automático supervisado para el fenotipado generalmente se basa en representaciones dispersas de los pacientes, como la bolsa de palabras. Consideramos una alternativa que implica aprender las representaciones de los pacientes. Desarrollamos un modelo de red neuronal para aprender las representaciones de los pacientes y demostramos que las representaciones aprendidas son lo suficientemente generales como para obtener un rendimiento de vanguardia en una tarea de detección de comorbilidad estándar.', 'pt': 'A mineração de registros eletrônicos de saúde para pacientes que atendem a um conjunto de critérios predefinidos é conhecida em informática médica como fenotipagem. A fenotipagem tem inúmeras aplicações, como previsão de resultados, recrutamento de ensaios clínicos e estudos retrospectivos. O aprendizado de máquina supervisionado para fenotipagem normalmente depende de representações esparsas de pacientes, como um saco de palavras. Consideramos uma alternativa que envolve o aprendizado das representações do paciente. Desenvolvemos um modelo de rede neural para aprender representações de pacientes e mostramos que as representações aprendidas são gerais o suficiente para obter desempenho de última geração em uma tarefa padrão de detecção de comorbidade.', 'ja': 'あらかじめ定義された一連の基準を満たす患者のための電子健康記録をマイニングすることは、医療情報学では表現型診断として知られています。表現型診断には、転帰予測、臨床試験の採用、後ろ向き研究などの多くの応用がある。表現型づくりのための監督された機械学習は、典型的には、言葉の袋などのまばらな患者表現に依存する。私たちは、患者の表現を学習することを含む代替案を検討しています。患者の表現を学習するためのニューラルネットワークモデルを開発し、学習された表現が標準的な併存症検出タスクで最先端のパフォーマンスを得るのに十分な一般的なものであることを示します。', 'zh': '为足预定义者掘之电子录于医学信息学中谓之表型。 表型多所应用,如果占候,临床试验募回顾性研究。 以表型之监机器学常赖于疏,如单词囊。 我们想了一种及学患者表徵的代方案。 开神经网络以学征,明学足以通用,检合并症先进之性也。', 'hi': 'उन रोगियों के लिए खनन इलेक्ट्रॉनिक स्वास्थ्य रिकॉर्ड जो पूर्वनिर्धारित मानदंडों के एक सेट को पूरा करते हैं, उन्हें चिकित्सा सूचना विज्ञान में फेनोटाइपिंग के रूप में जाना जाता है। Phenotyping इस तरह के परिणाम भविष्यवाणी, नैदानिक परीक्षण भर्ती, और पूर्वव्यापी अध्ययन के रूप में कई अनुप्रयोगों है। फेनोटाइपिंग के लिए पर्यवेक्षित मशीन लर्निंग आमतौर पर बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स जैसे विरल रोगी प्रतिनिधित्व पर निर्भर करती है। हम एक विकल्प पर विचार करते हैं जिसमें रोगी प्रतिनिधित्व सीखना शामिल है। हम रोगी प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल विकसित करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि सीखा प्रतिनिधित्व एक मानक कोमॉर्बिडिटी डिटेक्शन कार्य पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने के लिए पर्याप्त सामान्य हैं।', 'ru': 'Разработка электронных медицинских карт для пациентов, которые удовлетворяют набору заранее определенных критериев, известна в медицинской информатике как фенотипирование. Фенотипирование имеет множество применений, таких как прогнозирование исходов, набор в клинические исследования и ретроспективные исследования. Контролируемое машинное обучение для фенотипирования обычно основывается на редких представлениях пациентов, таких как мешок слов. Мы рассматриваем альтернативу, которая включает в себя изучение представлений пациентов. Разработана нейросетевая модель для изучения представлений пациентов и показано, что изученные представления являются достаточно общими, чтобы получить современную производительность по стандартной задаче обнаружения сопутствующих заболеваний.', 'ga': 'Tugtar feinitíopáil ar thaifid leictreonacha sláinte mianadóireachta d’othair a shásaíonn sraith critéar réamhshainithe. Tá go leor feidhmchláir ag baint le feinitíopáil amhail torthaí a thuar, earcú trialach cliniciúla, agus staidéir chúlghabhálacha. Go hiondúil braitheann meaisínfhoghlaim maoirsithe le haghaidh feinitíopáil ar léirithe tearca othar amhail mála focal. Breithnímid rogha eile a bhaineann le hionadaíochtaí othar a fhoghlaim. Forbraímid samhail líonra néarúil chun léiriú othar a fhoghlaim agus léirímid go bhfuil na huiríll foghlamtha ginearálta go leor chun feidhmíocht úrscothach a fháil ar thasc caighdeánach braite comh-ghalarachta.', 'ka': 'პაციენტებისთვის ელექნონტური ჯანმრთელობა, რომლებიც წინ განსაზღვრებული კრიტერიების ნაწილს შეუძლებელია, მედიცინური ინფორმატიკში როგორც ფენოტიპებ ფინოტიპების შესახებ მრავალ პროგრამები, როგორც შესახებ წარმოდგენა, კლინიკური პროგრამები და retrospective studies. ფენოტიფიკაციის მონაცემები მაქანის სწავლება ტიპოლურად დარწმუნდება, როგორც სიტყვების ფანჯარა. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ ალტენტრუმენტი, რომელიც მოვისწავლეთ პაციენტის გამოსახულება. ჩვენ განვითარებთ ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელი პაციენტის გამოსწავლებისთვის და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ სწავლილი გამოსწავლებები უფრო სარგებელია, რომ მივიღოთ სტანდარული კომპორბიდიტის განა', 'hu': 'Az előre meghatározott kritériumoknak megfelelő betegek elektronikus egészségügyi nyilvántartásainak bányászata az orvosi informatikában fenotípusként ismert. A fenotípusoknak számos alkalmazása van, mint például az eredmények előrejelzése, a klinikai vizsgálatok toborzása és a retrospektív vizsgálatok. A fenotípusok felügyelt gépi tanulása általában ritka betegek reprezentációján alapul, mint például a zsák-of-words. Olyan alternatívát gondolunk, amely magában foglalja a betegek reprezentációinak tanulását. Kifejlesztünk egy neurális hálózati modellt a betegek reprezentációinak tanulására, és megmutatjuk, hogy a tanult reprezentációk elég általánosak ahhoz, hogy egy standard komorbiditás detektálási feladat során korszerű teljesítményt érjenek el.', 'el': 'Η εξόρυξη ηλεκτρονικών αρχείων υγείας για ασθενείς που πληρούν ένα σύνολο προκαθορισμένων κριτηρίων είναι γνωστή στην ιατρική πληροφορική ως φαινοτυπία. Η φαινοτυπία έχει πολλές εφαρμογές όπως πρόβλεψη αποτελεσμάτων, πρόσληψη κλινικών δοκιμών και αναδρομικές μελέτες. Η εποπτευόμενη μηχανική μάθηση για τον φαινοτυπισμό συνήθως βασίζεται σε σπάνιες αναπαραστάσεις ασθενών όπως σακούλες λέξεων. Εξετάζουμε μια εναλλακτική λύση που περιλαμβάνει την εκμάθηση αναπαραστάσεων ασθενών. Αναπτύσσουμε ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου για την εκμάθηση αναπαραστάσεων ασθενών και καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι διδαγμένες αναπαραστάσεις είναι αρκετά γενικές ώστε να επιτύχουν την απόδοση της τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε μια τυπική εργασία ανίχνευσης συνδορδιότητας.', 'it': "L'estrazione di cartelle cliniche elettroniche per pazienti che soddisfano una serie di criteri predefiniti è nota nell'informatica medica come fenotipia. Fenotiping ha numerose applicazioni come la previsione dei risultati, il reclutamento di studi clinici e studi retrospettivi. L'apprendimento automatico supervisionato per il fenotipo in genere si basa su rappresentazioni sparse dei pazienti come il sacco di parole. Consideriamo un'alternativa che prevede l'apprendimento delle rappresentazioni dei pazienti. Sviluppiamo un modello di rete neurale per l'apprendimento delle rappresentazioni dei pazienti e mostriamo che le rappresentazioni apprese sono abbastanza generali da ottenere prestazioni all'avanguardia su un compito standard di rilevamento della comorbidità.", 'kk': 'Алдын- ала анықталған критерияларды қабылдайтын пациенттердің электрондық саулық жазулары медицина мәліметтерінде фенотипинг деп белгіледі. Фенотипинг нәтижелерді таңдау, клиникалық зерттеулер және retrospective зерттеулері секілді көптеген қолданбалар бар. Фенотипингі бақылау үшін машинаның үйренімі әдетте пациенттердің кеңістіктеріне тәуелді, мысалы, сөздердің кеңістіктеріне тәуелді. Біз пациенттің түсініктемелерін үйрену альтернативті ойлаймыз. Біз пациенттерді оқыту үшін невралдық желінің моделін жасап, оқыту үшін оқыту үшін үйренген мәліметтер стандартты коморбидиттік тапсырмасының күй- жайымдық тапсырмасын алу үшін жал', 'lt': 'Elektroninių kasybos įrašų gavyba pacientams, kurie atitinka iš anksto nustatytus kriterijus, medicininėje informacinėje srityje vadinama fenotipu. Phenotyping has numerous applications such as outcome prediction, clinical trial recruitment, and retrospective studies.  Priežiūrėtas aparatinis mokymasis fenotipu paprastai grindžiamas retais pacientų aprašymais, pavyzdžiui, žodžių maišeliu. Mes svarstome alternatyvą, apimančią pacientų atstovavimą mokymąsi. Kuriame neurologinio tinklo model į, skirtą pacientų atstovavimui mokytis, ir parodysime, kad išmokti atstovavimai yra pakankamai bendri, kad būtų galima pasiekti naujausius rezultatus atliekant standartinę komorbidiškumo nustatymo užduotį.', 'mk': 'Во медицинската информатика се позната како фенотипирање на електронските здравствени записи за пациентите кои исполнуваат одреден број предодредени критериуми. Фенотипирањето има бројни апликации како што се предвидување на исходите, регрутирање на клинички процеси и ретроспективни студии. Набљудуваното машинско учење за фенотипирање обично зависи од ретки претставувања на пациентите, како што е вреќата со зборови. Размислуваме за алтернатива која вклучува учење на претставувања на пациентите. Развиваме нервен мрежен модел за учење на претставувања на пациентите и покажуваме дека научените претставувања се доволно генерални за да се добие најсовремена изведба на стандардна задача за детекција на коморбидата.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു കൂട്ടം പരിഹാരം തൃപ്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രോഗികള്\u200dക്ക് ഇലക്ട്രോണിക് ആശ്വാസത്തിന്റ ഫിനോട്ടൈപ്പിങ്ങിന്റെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരുപാട് പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുണ്ട്, ഫലം പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്, ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d വി സാധാരണയായി സ്പാര്\u200dട്ടൈപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി പഠിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രം സാധാരണ രോഗികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d ആശ രോഗിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് ഒരു മാറ്റം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. രോഗിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. പഠിച്ച പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d സ', 'mt': 'It-tħaffir ta’ rekords elettroniċi tas-saħħa fil-minjieri għal pazjenti li jissodisfaw sett ta’ kriterji definiti minn qabel huwa magħruf fl-informatika medika bħala fenotip. Il-fenotipar għandu bosta applikazzjonijiet bħall-previżjoni tar-riżultati, ir-reklutaġġ tal-provi kliniċi, u studji retrospettivi. It-tagħlim tal-magni superviż għall-fenotip tipikament jiddependi fuq rappreżentazzjonijiet rari tal-pazjenti bħal borża tal-kliem. Aħna nqisu alternattiva li tinvolvi t-tagħlim tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-pazjenti. We develop a neural network model for learning patient representations and show that the learned representations are general enough to obtain state-of-the-art performance on a standard comorbidity detection task.', 'ms': 'Menyembah rekod kesehatan elektronik bagi pesakit yang memenuhi set kriteria yang terdefinisikan adalah diketahui dalam informasi perubatan sebagai fenotip. Fenotip mempunyai banyak aplikasi seperti ramalan hasil, penerimaan ujian klinik, dan kajian retrospektif. Pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi untuk fenotip biasanya bergantung pada perwakilan pasien yang jarang seperti beg-of-words. Kami mempertimbangkan alternatif yang melibatkan belajar persembahan pesakit. Kami mengembangkan model rangkaian saraf untuk belajar perwakilan pesakit dan menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan belajar cukup umum untuk mendapatkan prestasi terbaik pada tugas pengesan komorbiditi piawai.', 'mn': 'Электроник эрүүл мэндийн бичил баримтууд өвчтөнүүдийн аль хэдийн тодорхойлогдсон шаардлагатай шаардлагатай болсон нь эмнэлгийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн хувьд фенотипинг гэдэг. Фенотипинг нь үр дүнг тодорхойлох, клиникийн судалгааны ажиллагаа болон retrospective судалгаануудтай олон хэрэглэгдэхүүн байдаг. Фенотипингийн удирдлагатай машины суралцах нь ихэвчлэн өвчтөнүүдийн жижиг хэлбэрээс хамаарна. Бид өвчтөн суралцахын тулд суралцах өөрчлөлт гэж боддог. Бид өвчтөн суралцахын тулд мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар бүтээж, сурсан үзүүлэлт нь стандарт коморбитийн ажил дээр урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргах хангалттай ихэвчлэн нийтлэг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Mining av elektroniske helseprogrammer for pasienter som tilfredsstiller eit sett av føredefinerte kriteriar er kjent i medisinformasjon som fenotisk. Fenotipisering har mange program som forebygging av resultat, rekruttering av kliniske prøver og retrospektiv studiar. Overvakt maskinelæring for fenotipisering er vanlegvis avhengig av sparse pasienter- representasjonar, slik som sak av ord. Vi ser på eit alternativ som involverer læring av pasientene. Vi utviklar eit neuralnettverksmodell for å lære pasientene representasjonar og viser at dei lærte representasjonane er generelle nok for å få tilstanden av kunsten på eit standard komorbiditetoppgåve.', 'ro': 'Extragerea fișelor de sănătate electronice pentru pacienții care îndeplinesc un set de criterii predefinite este cunoscută în informatica medicală ca fenotipizare. Fenotiping are numeroase aplicații, cum ar fi predicția rezultatelor, recrutarea studiilor clinice și studii retrospective. Învățarea automată supravegheată pentru fenotipire se bazează, de obicei, pe reprezentări rare ale pacienților, cum ar fi sacul de cuvinte. Considerăm o alternativă care implică învățarea reprezentărilor pacienților. Dezvoltăm un model de rețea neurală pentru învățarea reprezentărilor pacienților și arătăm că reprezentările învățate sunt suficient de generale pentru a obține performanțe de ultimă oră pe o sarcină standard de detectare a comorbidității.', 'pl': 'Wydobywanie elektronicznej dokumentacji zdrowia pacjentów spełniających zestaw predefiniowanych kryteriów jest w informatyce medycznej znane jako fenotypowanie. Fenotypowanie ma wiele zastosowań, takich jak przewidywanie wyników, rekrutacja badań klinicznych i badania retrospektywne. Nadzorowane uczenie maszynowe dla fenotypowania zazwyczaj opiera się na rzadkich reprezentacjach pacjentów, takich jak worek słów. Rozważamy alternatywę, która polega na nauce reprezentacji pacjenta. Opracowujemy model sieci neuronowej do uczenia się reprezentacji pacjentów i pokazujemy, że nauczone reprezentacje są wystarczająco ogólne, aby uzyskać najnowocześniejszą wydajność w standardowym zadaniu wykrywania współchoroby.', 'sr': 'Miniranje elektronskih zdravstvenih podataka za pacijente koji zadovoljavaju skup predodređenih kriterija poznato je u medicinskoj informaciji kao fenotipiranje. Fenotipiranje ima brojne aplikacije poput predviđenja ishoda, regrutovanja kliničkih ispitivanja i retrospektivnih ispitivanja. Naučenje nadzorne mašine za fenotipiranje obično se oslanja na rezervne reprezentacije pacijenata poput torbe reči. Smatramo alternativu koja uključuje zastupanje pacijenata. Razvijamo model neuralne mreže za učenje zastupanja pacijenata i pokazujemo da su naučene zastupanje dovoljno opšte da bi dobili predstavu stanja umjetnosti na standardnom zadatku za otkrivanje komorbiditete.', 'si': 'රෝගිකයෝ විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරපු විශ්වාසයක් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා වෛද්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාවක් ව ෆෙනොටිපින්ග් එක්ක විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම පෙන්නොටිප් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂා කරපු මැෂින් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා ප අපි හිතන්නේ වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන්. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලමාන්ත්\u200dරයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන', 'so': 'Qoraalka daryeelka caafimaadka ee elekterikaalka ah ee bukaanka ku raadiya koox cayiman oo horay loo yaqaan waxaa lagu yaqaan macluumaadka caafimaadka sida fikrada. Fiintotyping waxaa ku jira codsiyo badan, sida wax lagu sii sheegayo, in lagu soo dalbado baaritaanka caafimaadka, iyo waxbarashada dib u fiirsashada. Sida caadiga ah barashada mashiinka lagu hagayo waxyaabaha lagu qorayo waxay ku xiran tahay wakiilada bukaanka yar, tusaale ahaan baaskiga hadalka. We consider an alternative that involves learning patient representations.  Waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaab shabakadda neurada ah oo lagu baro wakiilada bukaanka, waxaana muujinaynaa in noocyada waxbarashadu ay si caadi ah ugu filan yihiin in lagu helo bandhigyada farshaxanka shaqaalaha si caadiga ah loo helo.', 'sv': 'Utvinning av elektroniska hälsojournaler för patienter som uppfyller en uppsättning fördefinierade kriterier kallas inom medicinsk informatik fenotypning. Fenotyping har många tillämpningar såsom utfall prognos, klinisk prövning rekrytering och retrospektiva studier. Övervakad maskininlärning för fenotypning förlitar sig vanligtvis på glesa patientrepresentationer såsom säck-of-words. Vi överväger ett alternativ som innebär att lära sig patientrepresentationer. Vi utvecklar en neural nätverksmodell för att lära sig patientrepresentationer och visar att de lärda representationerna är tillräckligt generella för att uppnå state-of-the-art prestanda på en vanlig komorbiditetsdetektionsuppgift.', 'ta': 'நோயாளிகளுக்கு முன்னிருந்து குறிப்பிட்ட ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட காரணங்களை தீர்வு செய்ய முடியும் மின்னஞ்சல் தகவல் என Phenotyping has numerous applications such as outcome prediction, clinical trial recruitment, and retrospective studies.  பொருள் வகைப்படுத்துவதற்கான மேல்பார்க்கப்பட்ட இயந்திரம் கற்றுக்கொள்வது வழக்கமாக நோயாளிகள் சிறிது கொள்ளும் ப நோயாளிகளின் பிரதிநிதிகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் ஒரு வேறு மாற்று நாம் கருதுகிறோம். நாம் ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரி உருவாக்குகிறோம் போது பொதுவான குறிப்புகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள முடியும் என்று காட்டுகிறோம் ஒரு நில', 'ur': 'بیماروں کے لئے الکترونیکی سلامتی رکوردوں کا ذخیره کرنا جو پہلے مقرر کیے ہوئے کریٹریٹیوں کے سٹے کو مطمئن کر رہے ہیں۔ فینوتیپینگ کے لئے بہت سی کاربرد ہیں جیسے نتیجہ کی پیش بینی، کلینیکی آزمائش کا انتخاب، اور پچھلوں کی تحقیقات. فینوٹیپینگ کے لئے موجود ماشین کی تعلیم معمولاً مضبوط صبر کے معاملات پر باقی رہتا ہے جیسے باغ کلمات کا سامان۔ ہم ایک الفاظ سمجھتے ہیں جو صبر کی تعلیمات میں شامل ہے۔ ہم ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک موڈل ایجاد کریں گے بیماروں کی تعلیمات کے لئے اور دکھائیں گے کہ سیکھے ہوئے نمائندے کافی عمومی ہیں کہ ایک استاندارڈ کمربیڈی پیدا کرنے کے لئے استاندارڈ کی کمربیڈی کا کام حاصل کریں.', 'uz': "Elektron sog'loqni tahrirlash uchun bir necha qoidalar qo'shilgan tibbiy maʼlumotlar faqat sifatida aniqlanadi. Phenotyping bilan bir nechta dasturlar mavjud. Natijo'ylab qo'yish, klinik tizimni ishlab chiqarish va retrospective o'qituvchilari kabi. Name Biz qo'lim qobiliyatlarini o'rganishni o'rganish uchun boshqa o'zgarishni o'ylaymiz. Biz ta'lim taʼminlovchilarini o'rganish uchun neyrol tarmoq modelini yaratishmiz va o'rganishlar tashkilotlarini andoza comorbidiya ishlash vazifasini olishga o'rganish uchun o'rganish taʼminlovchilari umumiy yetarli holatni yetarli.", 'vi': 'Tài liệu sức khỏe điện tử dành cho bệnh nhân đáp ứng một loạt các tiêu chuẩn đã xác định trước được biết là rất đặc biệt. Kiểu sốt có nhiều ứng dụng như dự đoán kết quả, tuyển dụng thử nghiệm lâm sàng và hậu quả. Giám sát việc học máy tạo hình thường dựa trên các biểu hiện của bệnh nhân ít ỏi như túi chữ. Chúng tôi xem xét một thay đổi liên quan đến học các bệnh nhân. Chúng tôi phát triển một mô hình mạng thần kinh để học các biểu tượng bệnh nhân và cho thấy các biểu tượng đã học đủ chung để đạt được trình độ tiến bộ tuyệt vời trong một nhiệm vụ tìm ra chất thần kinh chuẩn.', 'bg': 'Извличането на електронни здравни записи за пациенти, които отговарят на набор от предварително определени критерии, е известно в медицинската информатика като фенотип. Фенотипирането има множество приложения като прогнозиране на резултатите, подбор на клинични изпитвания и ретроспективни проучвания. Наблюдаваното машинно обучение за фенотипиране обикновено разчита на рядко представяне на пациентите, като например торба с думи. Ние разглеждаме алтернатива, която включва изучаване на представянето на пациента. Разработваме модел на невронна мрежа за изучаване на изображенията на пациентите и показваме, че научените изображения са достатъчно общи, за да получат най-съвременни резултати по стандартна задача за откриване на коморбидност.', 'da': 'Mine elektroniske sundhedsoplysninger for patienter, der opfylder et sæt foruddefinerede kriterier, kendes i medicinsk informatik som fænotypning. Phenotyping har mange anvendelser såsom udfaldsforudsigelse, kliniske forsøg rekruttering, og retrospektive undersøgelser. Overvåget maskinlæring til fænotypning afhænger typisk af sparsomme patientrepræsentationer såsom taske-of-words. Vi overvejer et alternativ, der involverer at lære patientrepræsentationer. Vi udvikler en neural netværksmodel til at lære patientrepræsentationer og viser, at de lærte repræsentationer er generelle nok til at opnå state-of-the-art performance på en standard comorbiditetsdetektionsopgave.', 'nl': 'Het mining van elektronische gezondheidsdossiers voor patiënten die voldoen aan een reeks vooraf gedefinieerde criteria is in de medische informatica bekend als fenotypering. Fenotyping heeft tal van toepassingen zoals uitkomstvoorspelling, rekrutering van klinische studies en retrospectieve studies. Supervised machine learning voor fenotypering berust meestal op schaarse patiëntrepresentaties zoals zak-met-woorden. We overwegen een alternatief waarbij we patiëntrepresentaties leren. We ontwikkelen een neuraal netwerkmodel voor het leren van patiëntrepresentaties en laten zien dat de geleerde representaties algemeen genoeg zijn om state-of-the-art prestaties te verkrijgen op een standaard comorbiditeitsdetectietaak.', 'hr': 'Miniranje elektronskih zdravstvenih podataka za bolesnike koji ispunjavaju skup predodređenih kriterija poznato je u medicinskoj informaciji kao fenotipiranje. Fenotipiranje ima brojne primjene poput predviđanja ishoda, regrutacije kliničkih ispitivanja i retrospektivnih ispitivanja. Naučenje nadzornog stroja za fenotipiranje obično se oslanja na rezervne predstave pacijenata poput torbe riječi. Smatramo alternativu koja uključuje zastupanje pacijenata. Razvijamo model neuronske mreže za učenje zastupanja pacijenata i pokazujemo da su učeni zastupnici dovoljno općeni da bi dobili postupak umjetnosti na standardnom zadatku za otkrivanje komorbiditete.', 'de': 'Das Mining elektronischer Gesundheitsakten für Patienten, die eine Reihe vordefinierter Kriterien erfüllen, wird in der Medizininformatik als Phänotypisierung bezeichnet. Phenotyping hat zahlreiche Anwendungen wie Ergebnisvorhersage, Rekrutierung klinischer Studien und retrospektive Studien. Supervised Machine Learning für Phänotypisierung basiert typischerweise auf spärlichen Patientendarstellungen wie Wortbeutel. Wir erwägen eine Alternative, die das Erlernen von Patientendarstellungen beinhaltet. Wir entwickeln ein neuronales Netzwerkmodell zum Lernen von Patientendarstellungen und zeigen, dass die erlernten Repräsentationen allgemein genug sind, um den Stand der Technik bei einer Standard-Komorbiditätserkennung zu erreichen.', 'id': 'Menyembah catatan kesehatan elektronik bagi pasien yang memenuhi set kriteria yang terdefinisikan sebelumnya dikenal dalam informasi medis sebagai fenotip. Fenotip memiliki banyak aplikasi seperti prediksi hasil, rekrutan percobaan klinis, dan studi retrospektif. Pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi untuk fenotip biasanya bergantung pada representation pasien yang jarang seperti tas-kata. Kita mempertimbangkan alternatif yang melibatkan belajar representation pasien. Kami mengembangkan model jaringan saraf untuk belajar representation pasien dan menunjukkan bahwa representation belajar cukup umum untuk mendapatkan prestasi terbaik pada tugas deteksi komorbiditas standar.', 'sw': 'Kupunguza rekodi za afya za umeme kwa wagonjwa wanaokufadhili kiwango fulani cha vigezo vilivyotanguliwa kinafahamika katika taarifa za afya kama namna ya kutangaza. Phenotyping ina matumizi mengi kama vile utabiri wa matokeo, kuajirishwa kwa mashitaka ya kliniki na tafiti za nyuma. Mashine yanayosukumiwa kujifunza kwa ajili ya kuandika mambo kwa kawaida hutegemea maoni ya wagonjwa wachache kama vile mfumo wa maneno. Tunaona mbadala ambalo linahusisha kujifunza wakilisha wagonjwa. Tunaweza kutengeneza muundo wa mtandao wa kisasa kwa ajili ya kujifunza wakilishi mgonjwa na kuonyesha kuwa maonesho ya wanafunzi ni jumla ya kutosha kupata hali ya sanaa katika kazi ya kutafuta ushirikiano wa kawaida.', 'fa': 'گزارش سلامتی الکترونیکی برای بیماران که مجموعه شرایط پیش\u200cفرض شده\u200cاند، در اطلاعات پزشکی به عنوان فانوتایپ شناخته می\u200cشود. فینوتیپینگ کاربردهای زیادی مثل پیش بینی نتیجه، استخدام آزمایش کلینیکی و تحقیقات بازگشت دارد. یادگیری ماشین تحت نظر برای فنوتایپ معمولاً بر نمایش بیماران کمی مانند کیف کلمات بستگی دارد. ما به عنوان جایگزینی که درگیر آموزش نمایش بیماران است فکر می کنیم. ما یک مدل شبکه عصبی برای یادگیری نمایش بیماران را توسعه می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که نمایش\u200cهای یاد گرفته\u200cاند به اندازه کافی عمومی برای یادگیری عمومی هنری در یک کار شناسایی استاندارد کمربیدی است.', 'tr': 'Lukmanyň ön bellenen kriteriýasyny saýlamak ýagdaýlary üçin elektronik saglyk kaynaklary ahyry bolup geçýär. Fenotipiniň netijeli öngörüm, kliniki barlama we retrospektiv aramalary ýaly birnäçe uygulamalary bar. Fenoterap üçin gözetlenýän maşynyň öwrenmesi adatça hasaplançylar ýaly çöplük sözlerine adatýar. Biz sabyrlary temsillerini öwrenmek üçin bir seçenek pikir edýäris. Hastalar temsillerini öğrenmek üçin bir nöral a ğ modelini geliştirdik we öğrendikleri temsiller standart komorbidity tanımlama görevinde bu şekilde düzgün bir şekilde düzgün olduğunu gösteriyoruz.', 'sq': 'Mining electronic health records for patients who satisfy a set of predefined criteria is known in medical informatics as phenotyping.  Fenotipi ka aplikime të shumta të tilla si parashikimi i rezultateve, rekrutimi i provave klinike dhe studime retrospektive. Mësimi i mbikqyrur i makinave për fenotipin tipikisht mbështetet në përfaqësime të pakta të pacientëve të tilla si çanta e fjalëve. Ne konsiderojmë një alternativë që përfshin mësimin e përfaqësimeve të pacientëve. Ne zhvillojmë një model rrjeti nervor për të mësuar përfaqësimet e pacientëve dhe tregojmë se përfaqësimet e mësuara janë të mjaftueshme të përgjithshme për të marrë shfaqjen më të lartë në një detyrë standarte të zbulimit të komorbiditetit.', 'am': 'የኢሌክትሮኒካዊ ጤና ቀድሞ በተወሰነ ድጋፍ ለሚሞክሩ ደካማዎች በጥምቀት ማህበራዊ መረጃዎች እንደ አካባቢ መጠቀም የሚታወቁ ናቸው፡፡ ፎንጤክቲን የመፍጠር ትንቢት፣ የኪኒካሌ ፈተና መዝገብ እና የፍጥረት ትምህርት እንደሆነ ብዙ ፕሮግራሞች አሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪው መሳፍንት መምህርት በተጨማሪው የጽሑፍ ቃላት እንደሚመስል ታሪክ ላይ ነው፡፡ የሽማግሌን መልዕክት ለመማር የሚያስፈልገውን መተላለፍ እናስባለን፡፡ የኔውራዊ የድረ ገጽ ምሳሌ ለመማር እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'af': "Mining van elektroniese gesondrekords vir pasiënte wat 'n stel vooraf bepaalde kriterie verskaf is bekend in mediese informatike as fenotipe. Fenotipe het veelvuldige toepassings soos uitgevaardig voorskou, kliniske probeer rekruimteer en retrospektiewe studie. Ondersoekteerde masjien leer vir fenotipe tipies verlig op sparse paciente voorstellings soos sak van woorde. Ons beskou 'n alternatief wat onderwerp van die leer paciente voorstellings. Ons ontwikkel 'n neuralnetwerk model vir die leer van paciente voorstellings en wys dat die geleerde voorstellings algemeen genoeg is om state-of-the-art-prestasie te kry op 'n standaard komorbiditeit-opdekking taak.", 'hy': 'Բժշկական ինֆորմատիկայում բժշկական ինֆորմատիկայում հայտնի է որպես ֆենոտիպ: Ֆենոտիպը ունի բազմաթիվ ծրագրեր, ինչպիսիք են արդյունքների կանխատեսումը, կլինիկական փորձարկումների հավաքելը և հետադարձ ուսումնասիրությունները: Ֆենոտիպման մեխանիզմի ուսումնասիրությունը սովորաբար հիմնված է հիվանդների հազվադեպ ներկայացումների վրա, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ բառերը: Մենք համարում ենք այլընտրանք, որը ներառում է հիվանդների ներկայացումների սովորելը: Մենք զարգանում ենք հիվանդների ներկայացումների սովորելու նյարդային ցանցի մոդել և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սովորված ներկայացումները բավականին ընդհանուր են, որպեսզի ստանան ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ ստանդարտ համախմբականության հայտնաբերման գործում:', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə belə təsdiqlənmiş kriteriyətlərə sadiq olan xəstələrə elektronik sağlamlıq kayıtlarını dağıtmaq fenotipis olaraq tanınır. Fenotipinin sonuçları tədbir, kliniki imtahan edilməsi və retrospektiv təhsil kimi çoxlu faydalar var. Fenotifin öyrənməsi maşına bəzilərində səbr çubuğu kimi istifadə edir. Biz səbir göstəricisi ilə öyrənən alternatifi düşünürük. Biz xəstəlik göstəricilərini öyrənmək üçün nöral a ğ modelini təhsil edirik və göstəririk ki, öyrənmiş göstəricilər standart comorbidity keşfetməsi işlərində müəyyən edilən təhsil işləri qəbul edəcək qədər genel olaraq təhsil edirlər.', 'ko': '미리 정의된 기준을 충족시키기 위해 전자 건강 기록을 발굴하는 것을 의학정보학에서 표형이라고 부른다.표형 분석은 결과 예측, 임상시험 모집과 회고적 연구 등 많은 응용이 있다.표형 분석에 사용되는 감독기계 학습은 일반적으로 희소한 환자의 표시, 예를 들어 단어 가방에 의존한다.우리는 환자의 표징을 배우는 것을 포함해서 다른 방법을 고려한다.우리는 환자의 표징을 학습하는 신경 네트워크 모델을 개발했고 학습의 표징이 충분히 통용되고 표준적인 공병 검측 임무에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻을 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'ca': "En l'informàtica mèdica es coneix fenotipar la mineria de registres electrònics de salut dels pacients que satisfen un conjunt de criteris predefinits. El fenotipat té moltes aplicacions com la predicció dels resultats, el reclutament d'estudis clínics i estudis retrospectius. Supervised machine learning for phenotyping typically relies on sparse patient representations such as bag-of-words.  Considerem una alternativa que implica aprendre representacions dels pacients. Desenvolvem un model de xarxa neural per aprendre representacions de pacients i demostram que les representacions aprendides són prou generals per aconseguir un rendiment més avançat en una tasca de detecció de comorbiditat estàndard.", 'bn': 'Mining electronic health records for patients who satisfy a set of predefined criteria is known in medical informatics as phenotyping.  ফিনোটাইপিং এর অনেক অ্যাপ্লিকেশন রয়েছে যেমন ফলাফল ভবিষ্যত, ক্লিনিকিয়াল বিচারের রেকর্মকর্তা এবং পুনরায় সংকেত গবেষণ সাধারণত ব্যাগ-অফ-শব্দের মতো স্মান্য রোগীদের প্রতিনিধিত্বের উপর নির্ভর করে সুপারভিস্ট মেশিন শিক্ষা প্রদা আমরা একটা বিকল্প বিবেচনা করি যা রোগীদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে যাচ্ছে। আমরা রোগীদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষার জন্য নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল তৈরি করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে শিক্ষার্থীদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রকাশের জন্য সাধ', 'cs': 'Těžba elektronických zdravotních záznamů pro pacienty, kteří splňují sadu předem definovaných kritérií, je v lékařské informatice známá jako fenotypizace. Fenotypování má mnoho aplikací, jako je predikce výsledků, nábor klinických studií a retrospektivní studie. Dohlížené strojové učení pro fenotypizaci se obvykle spoléhá na řídké reprezentace pacientů, jako jsou pytle slov. Zvažujeme alternativu, která zahrnuje učení se reprezentace pacientů. Vyvíjíme model neuronové sítě pro učení se reprezentace pacientů a ukážeme, že učené reprezentace jsou dostatečně obecné pro dosažení nejmodernějšího výkonu na standardní úlohu detekce komorbidity.', 'et': 'Eelnevalt määratletud kriteeriumidele vastavate patsientide elektrooniliste terviseandmete kaevandamine on meditsiiniinformaatikas tuntud fenotüüpidena. Fenotüüp on palju rakendusi nagu tulemuste prognoosimine, kliinilise uuringu värbamine ja retrospektiivsed uuringud. Fenotüüpide jaoks järelevalve all olev masinõpe tugineb tavaliselt patsiendi hõredatele esitustele, näiteks sõnakotile. Me kaalume alternatiivi, mis hõlmab patsiendi esindamise õppimist. Töötame välja närvivõrgu mudeli patsientide representatsioonide õppimiseks ja näitame, et õppitud representatsioonid on piisavalt üldised, et saavutada kaasnevate haiguste tuvastamise standardülesande tipptasemel jõudlus.', 'fi': 'Sähköisten terveystietojen louhinta potilaille, jotka täyttävät tietyt ennalta määritellyt kriteerit, tunnetaan lääketieteellisessä informatiikassa fenotyyppinä. Fenotyping on lukuisia sovelluksia, kuten tulosten ennustaminen, kliinisten tutkimusten rekrytointi ja retrospektiiviset tutkimukset. Fenotypioinnin ohjattu koneoppiminen perustuu tyypillisesti harvoihin potilasesityksiin, kuten sanapussiin. Harkitsemme vaihtoehtoa, johon kuuluu potilaan representaatioiden oppiminen. Kehitämme neuroverkkomallin potilasrepresentaatioiden oppimiseen ja osoitamme, että opitut representaatiot ovat riittävän yleisiä saavuttaakseen huipputason suorituskykyä tavanomaisessa samanaikaisten sairauksien havaitsemistehtävässä.', 'bs': 'Miniranje elektronskih zdravstvenih podataka za bolesnike koji ispunjavaju skup predodređenih kriterija poznato je u medicinskoj informaciji kao fenotipiranje. Fenotipiranje ima brojne primjene kao što su predviđanje ishoda, regrutovanje kliničkih ispitivanja i retrospektivne ispitivanja. Naučenje nadzornih strojeva za fenotipiranje obično se oslanja na rezervne reprezentacije pacijenata poput torbe riječi. Smatramo alternativu koja uključuje zastupanje pacijenata. Razvijamo model neuralne mreže za učenje zastupanja pacijenata i pokazujemo da su naučeni predstavnici dovoljno općeni da bi dobili predstavu stanja umjetnosti na standardnom zadatku za otkrivanje komorbiditete.', 'jv': 'Daerah sing isi alam-alam sing dumadhi kanggo sab챗n dh챕w챕 챕ngawe gedh챕 kat챗pakan karo kesempatan sing larang dh챕w챕 kuwi nggawe barang dh챕w챕. Kerensi Global Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk bener Alternate sing nyenengak챕 m챗ng ngerasar pawaran sawar Awak dh챕w챕 nggawe model kuwi nggawe netwisik kanggo limian pawaran gambar nggawe sapa nyimpen kuwi mau.', 'sk': 'Izkopavanje elektronskih zdravstvenih evidenc za bolnike, ki izpolnjujejo niz vnaprej določenih meril, je v medicinski informatiki znano kot fenotipizacija. Fenotipiranje ima številne aplikacije, kot so napoved izida, rekrutiranje kliničnih preskušanj in retrospektivne študije. Nadzorovano strojno učenje za fenotipizacijo običajno temelji na redkih predstavitvah pacientov, kot je vreča besed. Razmišljamo o alternativi, ki vključuje učenje predstavitev pacientov. Razvijamo model nevronskega omrežja za učenje reprezentacij pacientov in pokažemo, da so pridobljene reprezentacije dovolj splošne za doseganje najsodobnejše uspešnosti pri standardni nalogi odkrivanja komorbidnosti.', 'ha': "Ina ƙaranci takardar tarakiki na Electron da aka yarda a ƙayyade kayarin da aka ƙayyade a gabani, an sani a cikin ma'anar matibabu kamar fenottyping. Phonotyping yana da wasu shiryoyin ayuka mãsu yawa kamar bashirin matsayi, da rekuran jarrabi na kima da bakwai-bayani. Kifin da aka samu karatun kafin da za'a karatun wa abunin da ke typically, yana dõgara a kan masu ƙaranci masu tsari kamar bags-of-words. Tuna ganin wata musanya da ke sha'anin a matsayin mãsu haƙuri. Tuna buɗe wani misali na'urar zuwa a sanar da shaidar mãsu haƙuri kuma tuna nuna cewa, misãlai da aka sanar su su zama mai isa ga iya sami da halin-da-sanar a kan wani aikin komorbudi na daidaita.", 'he': 'המכרה רשומות בריאות אלקטרוניות למטופלים שמספקים קבוצה של קריטורים מוגדרים מראש ידועה במידע רפואי כתוצאה. לפנוטיפ יש שימושים רבים כמו ציפוי התוצאות, גיוס ניסויים קליניים, ומחקרים רטרוספקטיביים. למידת מכונות ששומרת על התופעות תלויה בדרך כלל באמצעות מטופלים נדירות כמו שקית מילים. אנחנו שוקלים אלטרנטיבה שכוללת ללמוד מייצגים של מטופלים. אנחנו מפתחים מודל רשת עצבית ללמוד מייצגים של מטופלים ולהראות שהמייצגים הלימודים הם גנרליים מספיק כדי להשיג ביצועים מוקדמים על משימה סטנדרטית לגלות חברות.', 'bo': 'སྐྱེས་པ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་གློག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཞབས་ཞུ་བ་དག་གི་འཇིག་ཆས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆས་སྣང་བྱུང་སྲིད། ཕྱིར་ཚོང་གི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པས་གནད་སྡུད་རིམ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས། སྣང་ཚུལ་ལྟ་བུའི་ལག་གི་སློབ་བཟོ་བྱེད་མི་ལག་ལེན་གྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མི་སྐྱེས་པའི་བརྗོད་ཆས་གཞི་བཞག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་སྒེར་གྱི་རྩོམ་པ་སྟོན་པར་གཞན་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡོད་ཅིག་བསམ་བྱེད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྒེར་གྱི་རྩོམ་པ་སྟོན་པར་དབུས་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་ཆགས་བྱས་ན། སྟོན་པའི་རྩོམ་པ་ཚོ་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ'}
{'en': 'Polarity Computations in Flexible Categorial Grammar', 'ar': 'حسابات القطبية في القواعد الفئوية المرنة', 'fr': 'Calculs de polarité dans une grammaire catégorielle flexible', 'es': 'Cálculos de polaridad en gramática categorial flexible', 'pt': 'Cálculos de Polaridade em Gramática Categorial Flexível', 'ja': '柔軟なカテゴリアル文法における極性計算', 'zh': '灵活分类文法中极性算', 'hi': 'Flexible Categorial Grammar में Polarity Computations', 'ru': 'Вычисления полярности в гибкой грамматике категорий', 'ga': 'Ríomhanna Polarachta i nGramadach Sholúbtha Chatagóireach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Υπολογισμοί πολικότητας σε ευέλικτη κατηγορηματική γραμματική', 'hu': 'Polaritási számítások rugalmas kategóriai nyelvtan', 'it': 'Calcoli della polarità nella grammatica categorica flessibile', 'kk': 'Польшалық есептеулері жылғыз санаттық грамматтарындағы', 'mk': 'Компутации на поларитет во флексибилна категоријална грама', 'lt': 'Poliaritetiniai skaičiavimai lanksčioje kategorijinėje gramoje', 'ms': 'Komputasi Polariti dalam Gram Kategori Fleksibel', 'ml': 'Polarity Computations in Flexible Categorial Grammar', 'mt': 'Polarity Computations in Flexible Categorial Grammar', 'mn': 'Хөвхөн хэлбэрийн хэлбэрээр тооцоолох', 'no': 'Politiske datamaskiner i fleksibel kategorigrammar', 'pl': 'Obliczenia polarności w elastycznej gramatyce kategorii', 'ro': 'Calculul polarității în gramatica categorică flexibilă', 'sr': 'Polarno računalo u fleksibilnoj kategoriji', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණය පරිගණනය', 'so': 'Xisaameynta qeybta ee Flexible Grammar', 'sv': 'Polaritetsberäkningar i flexibel kategorigrammatik', 'ta': 'வெளியேறும் வகைப்பட்ட வகைப்படுத்தியில் பொருள் கணக்குகள்', 'ur': 'فالکسیبل کاٹیوریل گرم میں پولیاری کمپیوٹر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Изчисления за полярност в гъвкава категорична граматика', 'da': 'Polaritetsberegninger i fleksibel kategorigrammatik', 'hr': 'Polarnost računala u fleksibilnoj kategoriji Grammar', 'ko': '유연한 범주 문법 중의 극성 계산', 'nl': 'Polariteitsberekeningen in flexibele categoriale grammatica', 'fa': 'Computations Polarity in Flexible Category Grammar', 'sw': 'Polarity Computations in Flexible Categorial Grammar', 'af': 'Stencils', 'de': 'Polaritätsberechnungen in flexibler Kategorialgarmatik', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Çot', 'hy': 'Հաշվի առնելը ճկուն կատեգորիալ գրամայում', 'sq': 'Kompjutimet e poliaritetit në Gramë Kategorore Fleksible', 'az': 'Fleksibil Kategoriyal Grammar', 'bn': 'ফ্ল্যামেস্টিবেল শ্রেণীবিভাগ গ্রামারের পোলারিটি কম্পুটেশন', 'bs': 'Polarno računalo u fleksibilnoj kategoriji Grammar', 'cs': 'Polaritní výpočty v flexibilní kategoriální gramatice', 'et': 'Polaarsuse arvutused paindlikus kategooriagrammatikas', 'id': 'Komputasi Polaritas dalam Grama Kategori Fleksibel', 'fi': 'Polarity Computations in Joustava Kategorian Kielioppi', 'ca': 'Calculacions de polaritat en grama de categoria flexible', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izračuni polarnosti v fleksibilni kategorijski slovnici', 'he': 'מחשבי פוליטריות בגרמה קטגורית גמישה', 'bo': 'ཆུ་ཚོད་དང་བསླབ་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ནང་གི་སྣུམ་འཁོར་གྱི་རྩིས་འཁོར།'}
{'en': 'This paper shows how to take parse trees in CCG and algorithmically find the polarities of all the constituents. Our work uses the well-known polarization principle corresponding to function application, and we have extended this with principles for type raising and composition. We provide an algorithm, extending the polarity marking algorithm of van Benthem. We discuss how our system works in practice, taking input from the C&C parser.', 'ar': 'توضح هذه الورقة كيفية أخذ أشجار التحليل في CCG وإيجاد الخوارزميات القطبية لجميع المكونات. يستخدم عملنا مبدأ الاستقطاب المعروف جيدًا المطابق لتطبيق الوظيفة ، وقد قمنا بتوسيع هذا مع مبادئ رفع النوع والتكوين. نحن نقدم خوارزمية لتوسيع خوارزمية تعليم القطبية الخاصة بفان بينثيم. نناقش كيفية عمل نظامنا في الممارسة العملية ، مع أخذ المدخلات من محلل C&C.', 'pt': 'Este artigo mostra como obter árvores de análise sintática em CCG e encontrar algoritmicamente as polaridades de todos os constituintes. Nosso trabalho usa o conhecido princípio de polarização correspondente à aplicação de funções, e estendemos isso com princípios para levantamento e composição de tipos. Fornecemos um algoritmo, estendendo o algoritmo de marcação de polaridade de van Benthem. Discutimos como nosso sistema funciona na prática, recebendo informações do analisador C&C.', 'fr': "Cet article montre comment prendre des arbres d'analyse dans CCG et trouver algorithmiquement les polarités de tous les constituants. Notre travail utilise le principe de polarisation bien connu correspondant à l'application de la fonction, et nous l'avons étendu aux principes d'augmentation de type et de composition. Nous fournissons un algorithme qui étend l'algorithme de marquage de polarité de van Benthem. Nous discutons du fonctionnement pratique de notre système, en prenant en compte les données de l'analyseur C&C.", 'es': 'Este artículo muestra cómo tomar árboles de análisis en CCG y encontrar algorítmicamente las polaridades de todos los componentes. Nuestro trabajo utiliza el conocido principio de polarización correspondiente a la aplicación de funciones, y lo hemos ampliado con principios para la elevación de tipos y la composición. Proporcionamos un algoritmo que amplía el algoritmo de marcado de polaridad de van Benthem. Discutimos cómo funciona nuestro sistema en la práctica, tomando información del analizador de C&C.', 'ja': '本稿では、CCGにおける構文解析木を取り出し、すべての構成要素の極性をアルゴリズム的に求める方法を示す。我々の研究は、関数の応用に対応する既知の偏光原理を使用しており、これを型の上げ方や構成の原理で拡張してきました。Van Benthemの極性マーキングアルゴリズムを拡張したアルゴリズムを提供します。C&amp;Cパーサーからの入力を利用して、実際のシステムの仕組みについて説明します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर दिखाता है कि सीसीजी में पार्स पेड़ों को कैसे लिया जाए और एल्गोरिदमिक रूप से सभी घटकों की ध्रुवीयताओं को कैसे खोजें। हमारा काम फ़ंक्शन एप्लिकेशन के अनुरूप प्रसिद्ध ध्रुवीकरण सिद्धांत का उपयोग करता है, और हमने इसे प्रकार बढ़ाने और संरचना के लिए सिद्धांतों के साथ बढ़ाया है। हम एक एल्गोरिथ्म प्रदान करते हैं, वैन बेंथेम की ध्रुवीयता अंकन एल्गोरिथ्म का विस्तार करते हैं। हम चर्चा करते हैं कि हमारा सिस्टम व्यवहार में कैसे काम करता है, सी एंड सी पार्सर से इनपुट लेते हुए।', 'zh': '本文展CCG中取解析树,并因算法得分极性。 吾事用函数众所知极化理,而吾已以类合而广之矣。 供一算法,广范本特姆极性标算法。 论系统在实践中如何事业,取输于C&C解析器。', 'ru': 'В этой статье показано, как взять синтаксический анализ деревьев в CCG и алгоритмически найти полярности всех составляющих. Наша работа использует хорошо известный принцип поляризации, соответствующий применению функции, и мы расширили это с принципами для повышения типа и состава. Мы предоставляем алгоритм, расширяющий алгоритм маркировки полярности ван Бентема. Мы обсуждаем, как наша система работает на практике, используя данные анализатора C&amp;C.', 'ga': "Taispeánann an páipéar seo conas crainn a pharsáil i CCG agus polaraíochtaí na gcomhábhar go léir a aimsiú go algartam. Úsáideann ár gcuid oibre an prionsabal polaraithe aitheanta a fhreagraíonn d'fheidhmiú feidhme, agus tá sé seo leathnaithe againn le prionsabail a bhaineann le hardú cineál agus comhdhéanamh. Soláthraímid algartam, ag leathnú algartam marcála polaraíocht van Benthem. Déanaimid plé ar an gcaoi a n-oibríonn ár gcóras go praiticiúil, ag glacadh ionchur ón pharsálaí C&C.", 'ka': 'ეს დაახლოები ჩვენებს, როგორ CCG-ში პანსტირება და ალგორიტიმურად ყველა კონსტიუტენტის პოლარიტის მოძებნა. ჩვენი სამუშაო გამოიყენება ძალიან უცნობილი პოლარიზაციის პრინციპი, რომელიც კონფუნქციის პროგრამის შესახებ, და ჩვენ ამას პრინციპებით განვითარეთ ტი ჩვენ გან ბენისის ალგორიტიმს გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც პოლარიტის ალგორიტიმს გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ ვისაუბრობთ, როგორ ჩვენი სისტემა მუშაობს პრაქტიკულად, C&C პანსერიდან დავიწყებთ.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία δείχνει πώς να πάρει parse δένδρα σε CCG και αλγοριθμικά να βρει τις πολικότητες όλων των συστατικών. Το έργο μας χρησιμοποιεί την γνωστή αρχή πόλωσης που αντιστοιχεί στην εφαρμογή λειτουργίας, και την έχουμε επεκτείνει με αρχές για την αύξηση και τη σύνθεση τύπων. Παρέχουμε έναν αλγόριθμο, επεκτείνοντας τον αλγόριθμο σήμανσης πολικότητας του Βαν Μπέντεμ. Συζητούμε πώς λειτουργεί το σύστημά μας στην πράξη, παίρνοντας πληροφορίες από τον αναλυτή C&C.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja, hogyan lehet elemezni a fákat CCG-ben és algoritmikusan megtalálni az összes alkotóelem polaritását. Munkánk a funkcióalkalmazásnak megfelelő jól ismert polarizációs elvet alkalmazza, és ezt kiterjesztettük a típusemelés és összetétel elveivel. Van Benthem polaritásjelzési algoritmusának kiterjesztése. Megbeszéljük, hogyan működik rendszerünk a gyakorlatban, a C&C elemzőből származó adatokat veszünk fel.', 'it': "Questo articolo mostra come prendere gli alberi di analisi in CCG e trovare algoritmicamente le polarità di tutti i costituenti. Il nostro lavoro utilizza il noto principio di polarizzazione corrispondente all'applicazione della funzione, e lo abbiamo esteso con i principi per il sollevamento del tipo e la composizione. Forniamo un algoritmo che estende l'algoritmo di marcatura della polarità di van Benthem. Discutiamo come funziona il nostro sistema nella pratica, prendendo input dal parser C&C.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз CCG түрінде ағаштарды талдау және алгоритмдік түрінде барлық компоненттердің поляриттарын табуын көрсетеді. Біздің жұмысамыз функциялық қолданбаларға сәйкес келетін поляризациялық принципін қолданады. Біз бұны түрлерді көтеру және құрылыс үшін принциплерден кеңейту принцип Біз Van Benthem-тың поляриттік белгілеу алгоритмін кеңейту алгоритмін келтіреміз. Біз жүйеміздің тәжірибеде қалай жұмыс істейді, C&C талдаушынан келтірілген енгізімізді талқылаймыз.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente parodoma, kaip analizuoti medžius CCG ir algoritminiu būdu rasti visų sudedamųjų dalių poliarumą. Mūsų darbe naudojamas gerai žinomas poliarizacijos principas, atitinkantis funkcijų taikymą, ir mes jį išplėtėme su tipų didinimo ir sudėties principais. Mes pateikiame algoritmą, išplečiantį van Benthem poliarumo žymėjimo algoritmą. Mes diskutuojame apie tai, kaip mūsų sistema veikia praktiškai, naudodami C&C analizatoriaus indėlį.', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија покажува како да се анализираат дрвјата во ЦЦГ и алгоритмички да се најдат поларитетите на сите составници. Нашата работа го користи познатиот принцип на поларизација кој одговара на функционалната апликација, и го проширивме ова со принципи за зголемување на типот и композиција. Ние обезбедуваме алгоритм, проширувајќи го алгоритмот за означување на поларитетот на Ван Беним. Разговараме за тоа како нашиот систем функционира во практика, земајќи информации од C&C анализаторот.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menunjukkan bagaimana untuk menghurai pokok dalam CCG dan secara algoritmi mencari polariti semua komponen. Kerja kami menggunakan prinsip polarisasi yang diketahui yang sepadan dengan aplikasi fungsi, dan kami telah memperluas ini dengan prinsip untuk peningkatan jenis dan komposisi. Kami menyediakan algoritma, memperluas algoritma tanda polariti van Benthem. We discuss how our system works in practice, taking input from the C&C parser.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument juri kif għandhom jittieħdu s-siġar tal-analiżi fis-CCG u b’mod algoritmiku jinstabu l-polaritajiet tal-kostitwenti kollha. Ix-xogħol tagħna juża l-prinċipju ta’ polarizzazzjoni magħruf sew li jikkorrispondi għall-applikazzjoni tal-funzjoni, u estendilna dan bi prinċipji għat-tqajjim tat-tip u l-kompożizzjoni. Aħna nipprovdu algoritmu, li jestendi l-algoritmu tal-immarkar tal-polarità ta’ van Benthem. Aħna niddiskutu kif taħdem is-sistema tagħna fil-prattika, billi nieħdu kontribut mill-analizzatur C&C.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സിസിജിയില്\u200d പാര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d എടുക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയെന്ന് കാണിക്കുന്നു എന്നിട്ട് ആല്\u200dഗോരിതി നമ്മുടെ ജോലി പരിചയപ്പെട്ട പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെ പൊരുത്തപ്പെട്ടിരിക് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം നല്\u200dകുന്നു, വാന്\u200d ബെന്\u200dറിന്\u200dറെ അലക്ഗോരിതം വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d എങ്ങനെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നുവെന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. C', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser korleis tolking av trær i CCG og algoritmisk finn polarisitet av alle konstitusjonane. Arbeidet vårt bruker den kjente polariseringsprinsippet som tilsvarar funksjonsprogrammet, og vi har utvidet dette med prinsippene for oppheving og samansetting av typar. Vi tilbyr ein algoritme som utvidar den polaritetsmerkinga av van Benthem. Vi diskuterer korleis systemet vår fungerer i praksis, og tar inndata frå C&C-tolkaren.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł pokazuje, jak wziąć parse drzewa w CCG i algorytmicznie znaleźć polaryzacje wszystkich składników. W naszej pracy wykorzystujemy znaną zasadę polaryzacji odpowiadającą zastosowaniu funkcji i rozszerzyliśmy ją o zasady podnoszenia typu i składu. Dostarczamy algorytm, rozszerzający algorytm znakowania polaryzacji van Benthem. Omawiamy, jak działa nasz system w praktyce, biorąc dane z parsera C&C.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare arată cum să analizăm copacii în CCG și să găsim algoritmic polaritățile tuturor constituenților. Activitatea noastră folosește binecunoscutul principiu de polarizare corespunzător aplicării funcției, iar acest lucru a fost extins cu principii pentru ridicarea tipului și compoziția. Oferim un algoritm care extinde algoritmul de marcare a polarităţii lui Van Benthem. Discutăm modul în care funcționează sistemul nostru în practică, luând input de la parser C&C.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас CCG-д модыг хэрхэн хуваалцах вэ гэдгийг харуулж, алгоритмын хуваалцах вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний ажил функцийн хэрэглээнтэй харьцуулагдаж байгаа талаар мэдэгдэх polarization принципыг ашиглаж байна. Бид үүнийг төрлийн өсөлт болон бүтцийн зарчмаар нэмэгдүүлсэн. Бид ван Бенигийн уламжлалтын алгоритмыг нэмэх алгоритм гаргадаг. Бид систем хэрхэн дасгал хөдөлгөөнд ажилладаг талаар ярьж, C&C хуваарьтаас оруулалт авах талаар ярьж байна.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir pokazuje kako se analizira drveće u CCG-u i algoritmski naći polaritet svih sastavnika. Naš rad koristi poznat način polarizacije koji odgovara aplikaciji funkcije, i to smo proširili sa principima za podizanje i sastavu tipa. Mi obezbeđujemo algoritam, proširenjem algoritma za označavanje polarnosti van Benthem. Razgovaramo o tome kako naš sistem radi na praksi, uzimajući ulaz iz C&C analizatora.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව පෙන්වන්නේ CCG වල විශේෂ ගස්සක් ගන්න හා ඇල්ගෝරිත්මික විශේෂයෙන් හොයාගන්න හැම ප්\u200dරතිශේ අපේ වැඩේ හොඳින් දන්න ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන භාවිත කරනවා, සහ අපි මේක ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන සහ සංවිධාන සඳහා වි අපි ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් දෙන්නේ, වැන් බෙන්තියේ පොලෝසිටි අල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් වැඩ කරනවා. අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය කොහොමද වැඩ කරන්නේ කියලා කතා කරනවා, C&C පද්ධතියෙන් ඇතුල් ගන්න.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu muujiyaa sida loo qaadanayo geedaha kaniisadda ee CCG iyo sidoo kale si qasab ah loo helo doorashada oo dhan. Shuqulkayagu wuxuu isticmaalaa qaynuunka bandhigyada si fiican loo yaqaan oo u eg codsiga shaqada, waxaana ku sii fidinnay kaneecada korinta iyo sameynta. Waxaynu sameynaa algorithm, waxaana fidinayaa wasakhda warqadaha Van Bendem. Waxaynu ka sheekaynaa sida nidaamkayagu u shaqeeyo tababarida, markaannu ka soo qaadannaa input ka soo baxaya C&C.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats visar hur man tar parse träd i CCG och algoritmiskt hittar polariteterna hos alla beståndsdelar. Vårt arbete utgår från den välkända polariseringsprincipen som motsvarar funktionstillämpning och vi har utökat detta med principer för typhöjning och komposition. Vi tillhandahåller en algoritm som utökar polaritetsmärkningsalgoritmen för van Benthem. Vi diskuterar hur vårt system fungerar i praktiken och tar input från C&C parser.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் சிசிஜியில் பாலஸ் மரங்களை எவ்வாறு எடுக்க வேண்டும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது மற்றும் பொருள்களில் எல் எங்கள் வேலை செயல்பாடு பயன்பாட்டுக்கு பொருத்தமான தெரியும் பரிசுத்தம் விதிமுறையை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, மற்றும் நாம் இதை வகை உயர வான் பென்னின் குறிக்குறியீட்டை நாம் ஒரு அல்gorithm வழங்குகிறோம். நாம் எங்கள் கணினி எப்படி இயங்குகிறது என்பதை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம், C&C தொகுப்பிலிருந்து உள்ளீடு எடுத', 'ur': 'This paper shows how to parse trees in CCG and algorithmically find the polarities of all constituents. ہمارا کام بہتر معلوم پولاریزی قانون استعمال کرتا ہے جو функцион کاربری کے ساتھ مطابق ہے، اور ہم نے اسے قانون اٹھانے اور پیدا کرنے کے لئے تقویت کے ساتھ پھیلایا ہے۔ ہم ایک الگوریٹم دیتے ہیں، وان بن کے آلگوریٹم کو پھیلاتے ہیں۔ ہم نے اپنے سیسٹم کو کس طرح کام کرتا ہے اور سی&C پارچر سے اینپیٹ لیتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz CCG'da parse daraxtlarini qanday qilishni ko'rsatadi va algorik qilib, hamma mualliflarning polarini topishini ko'rsatadi. Bizning ishimiz funksiyatlarni qoidaga bog'liq aniqlash qoidadan foydalanadi va biz buni bir qanday qoidalar bilan ko'paydik. Biz algoritni ko'rsamiz va van Benning algoritni ko'paytirish. Biz tizimmiz muvaffaqiyatlarida qanday ishlaydi, C&C parametrlaridan kiritishni talab qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cho thấy cách chiếm cây phân tích trong CCG và theo thuật to án tìm ra các cực của tất cả các thành phần. Công việc của chúng tôi sử dụng nguyên tắc chế độ phổ biến tương ứng với ứng dụng hàm, và chúng tôi đã mở rộng nó với các nguyên tắc nâng cao kiểu và cấu tạo. Chúng tôi cung cấp thuật toán khuếch đại thuật toán đánh dấu cực quan trọng của van Bentley. Chúng tôi bàn về cách hoạt động thực tế của hệ thống, lấy thông tin từ nhà phân tích C., C.C.', 'bg': 'Тази статия показва как да се анализират дърветата в ЦКГ и алгоритмично да се намерят поляритетите на всички съставки. Нашата работа използва добре познатия принцип на поляризация, съответстващ на функционалното приложение, и ние разширихме това с принципи за повдигане на типа и композиция. Предоставяме алгоритъм, който разширява алгоритъма за маркиране на полярността на Ван Бентем. Ние обсъждаме как нашата система работи на практика, като вземаме информация от анализатора.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir pokazuje kako se analizira drveće u CCG-u i algoritmski naći polaritet svih sastavnika. Naš rad koristi poznato načelo polarizacije odgovarajući aplikaciji funkcije, i to smo proširili s načelima za podizanje i sastavu tipa. Mi dajemo algoritam, proširenjem algoritma označavanja polarnosti van Benthem. Razgovaramo o tome kako naš sustav radi na praksi, uzimajući ulaz iz C&C analizatora.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel laat zien hoe parse bomen in CCG te nemen en algoritmisch de polariteiten van alle bestanddelen te vinden. Ons werk maakt gebruik van het bekende polarisatieprincipe dat overeenkomt met functietoepassing, en we hebben dit uitgebreid met principes voor typeoverheffing en samenstelling. We bieden een algoritme, dat het polariteitsmarkeringsalgoritme van van Benthem uitbreidt. We bespreken hoe ons systeem in de praktijk werkt, met input van de C&C parser.', 'da': 'Denne artikel viser, hvordan man tager parse træer i CCG og algoritmisk finder polariteterne af alle bestanddelene. Vores arbejde anvender det velkendte polariseringsprincip svarende til funktionsanvendelse, og vi har udvidet dette med principper for typehævning og sammensætning. Vi leverer en algoritme, der udvider polaritetsmærkningsalgoritmen af van Benthem. Vi diskuterer, hvordan vores system fungerer i praksis, ved at tage input fra C&C parser.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit zeigt, wie man Parse-Bäume in CCG nimmt und algorithmisch die Polaritäten aller Bestandteile findet. Unsere Arbeit verwendet das bekannte Polarisationsprinzip entsprechend der Funktionsanwendung, und wir haben dieses um Prinzipien zur Typerhöhung und Zusammensetzung erweitert. Wir stellen einen Algorithmus zur Verfügung, der den Polaritätsmarkierungsalgorithmus von van Benthem erweitert. Wir diskutieren, wie unser System in der Praxis funktioniert, indem wir Input aus dem C&C Parser nehmen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menunjukkan bagaimana untuk mengambil pemeriksaan pohon di CCG dan secara algoritmi menemukan polaritas semua konstitusi. Pekerjaan kami menggunakan prinsip polarisasi yang terkenal yang cocok dengan aplikasi fungsi, dan kami telah memperluas ini dengan prinsip untuk peningkatan tipe dan komposisi. Kami menyediakan algoritma, memperluas algoritma tanda polaritas van Benthem. We discuss how our system works in practice, taking input from the C&C parser.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ نشان می دهد که چگونه درختان را در CCG بررسی کنیم و الگوریتم به طور الگوریتم نقطه\u200cهای تمام محصولات را پیدا کنیم. کار ما از قانون قطبی شناخته شده که مربوط به کاربرد عملکرد است استفاده می\u200cکند، و ما این را با قانون برای افزایش و ترکیب نوع گسترش دادیم. ما الگوریتم را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که الگوریتم\u200cهای نقطه\u200cگیری van Benthem را گسترش می\u200cدهیم. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که سیستم ما چگونه در تمرین کار می\u200cکند و از طریق ویرایشگر C&C وارد می\u200cشود.', 'af': "Hierdie papier vertoon hoe om verwerking bome in CCG te neem en algoritme die polarisies van alle konstitusies te vind. Ons werk gebruik die goed bekende polarisasie-prinsipel wat ooreenstemmende aan funksie toepassing, en ons het dit uitgebrei met prinsipels vir tipe opweking en opstelling. Ons verskaf 'n algoritme, uitbrei die polariteit merking algoritme van van Benthem. Ons bespreek hoe ons stelsel in praksie werk en invoer van die C&C-ontleerder.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz CCG'de agaçlary nähili analyze edilmelidigini we algoritmik hemme constituntlaryň polarityny tapylýandygyny görkezýär. Biziň işimiz funksiýa täsirli bilinen polarizasyň prinsipini ulanýar we muny täze we biýtgetmek üçin prinsiplerimiz bilen uzatdyrdyk. Biz van Benthem'in polaritet işaretleme algoritmini uzatmak için bir algoritmi temin ediyoruz. Sistemimiziň praktika nädip işleýändigini we C&C çözümlerden giriş alyp diskusiýarys.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በCCG ውስጥ የፓርስ ዛፎችን እንዴት እንደሚወስድ እና በመንግሥት ላይ የሁሉን ምርጫ ማግኘት ያሳያል፡፡ ሥራችን የሚታወቀውን የመርየም ፕሮግራም በሚያሳየው የሥርዓት ሥርዓት ይጠቅማል፤ ይህንንም ለዓይነት ማሳሳየት እና ለመቀናቀል ሥርዓት ሰጥተናል፡፡ አሌጎሪትምን እናሳርፋለን የvan ቢኖምን መግለጫ እናሰፋታለን። ሲስተምረታችን እንዴት እንደሚሠራ ከC&C ተሳታፊ ጥያቄን እንወስዳለን፡፡', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha jinsi ya kuchukua mti wa magari katika CCG na kwa ujumla kutafuta uchaguzi wa wapiga kura wote. Kazi zetu inatumia kanuni ya uchaguzi inayofanana na matumizi ya kazi, na tumepandisha kanuni za aina ya kukuza na ujenzi. Tunatoa algorithi, kuongeza utaratibu wa uchafuzi unaoonyesha alama ya van Benthem. Tunajadili jinsi mfumo wetu unavyofanya kazi katika mazoea, kwa kuchukua input kutoka kwenye mchambuzi wa C&C.', 'ko': '본고는 CCG에서 해석 트리를 어떻게 얻고 알고리즘을 통해 모든 성분의 극성을 찾아내는지 보여준다.우리의 작업은 함수 응용에 대응하는 모두가 알고 있는 극화 원리를 사용하고 유형 향상과 합성 원리로 이를 확장했다.우리는 vanbenthem의 극성 표기 알고리즘을 확장하는 알고리즘을 제공했다.우리는 C&C 해상도에서 입력을 받아서 시스템이 어떻게 작동하는지 토론했다.', 'az': "Bu kağıt CCG içində ağacların ayırılmasını və algoritmi olaraq bütün komponentlərin polarisini tapmağını göstərir. Bizim işimiz funksiyalıq uyğulamasına uyğun bilinmiş polarizasyon prinsipini istifadə edir, və biz bunu tür yükselmə və kompozisyon üçün növləri ilə uzatdıq. Biz van Benthem'in polyarlığı işaretləmə algoritmini genişləyirik. Sistemimizin praktika necə işlədiyini, C&C ayırıcından giriş almağı müzakirə edirik.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা দেখাচ্ছে কিভাবে সিসিজিতে পার্স গাছ নিয়ে যাওয়া যায় এবং আলগরিকত্বে সকল ভোটারদের নির্বাচন খুঁজে বের করা  আমাদের কাজ ভালোভাবে পরিচিত দূষণ নীতি ব্যবহার করে ফাংশনের আপ্লিকেশনের সাথে যুক্ত, আর আমরা এটা বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছি টাইপের উৎপাদন এবং স আমরা একটা অ্যালগরিদম প্রদান করি, ভ্যান বেনেদের আলগরিদম বৃদ্ধি করে। আমরা আলোচনা করি কিভাবে আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রক্রিয়ায় কাজ করে, সি&সি বিশ্লেষক থেকে ইনপুট নিয়ে যাচ্ছি।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir pokazuje kako se analizira drveće u CCG-u i algoritmski naći polaritet svih sastavnika. Naš rad koristi poznat način polarizacije koji odgovara aplikaciji funkcije, i to smo proširili sa principima za podizanje i sastavu tipa. Mi pružamo algoritam, proširenjem algoritma označavanja polarnosti van Benthem. Razgovaramo o tome kako naš sistem radi na praksi, uzimajući ulaz iz C&C analizatora.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ցույց է տալիս, թե ինչպես վերցնել կենտրոնային հատվածների ծառերը և ալգորիթմիկ կերպ գտնել բոլոր բաղադրիչների կողմնականությունը: Մեր աշխատանքը օգտագործում է հայտնի պոլարիզացիայի սկզբունքը, որը համապատասխանում է ֆունկցիայի կիրառումներին, և մենք սա ընդլայնել ենք տեսակի բարձրացման և բաղադրության սկզբունքներով: Մենք ապահովում ենք ալգորիթմ, որը ընդլայնում է Վան Բենիթմի հյուսիսականության նշանակման ալգորիթմը: Մենք քննարկում ենք, թե ինչպես է մեր համակարգը գործում իրականությամբ, օգտագործելով C-C վերլուծողի ներմուծը:', 'et': 'See töö näitab, kuidas võtta parse puud CCG ja algoritmiliselt leida kõigi koostisosade polaarsus. Meie töös kasutatakse funktsiooni rakendamisele vastavat tuntud polarisatsiooni põhimõtet ning oleme seda laiendanud tüübi tõstmise ja kompositsiooni põhimõtetega. Pakume algoritmi, mis laiendab van Benthemi polaarsuse märgistamise algoritmi. Arutame, kuidas meie süsteem praktikas toimib, võttes arvesse C&C parserit.', 'sq': 'This paper shows how to take parse trees in CCG and algorithmically find the polarities of all the constituents.  Puna jonë përdor parimin e polarizimit të njohur që korrespondon me aplikimin e funksionit, dhe ne e kemi zgjeruar këtë me parime për ngritjen e llojeve dhe përbërjen. Ne ofrojmë një algoritëm, duke zgjeruar algoritmin e shënimit të polaritetit të van Benthem. Ne diskutojmë se si funksionon sistemi ynë në praktikë, duke marrë input nga analizuesi C&C.', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､mﾃ､ artikkeli osoittaa, miten analysoidaan puita CCG:ssﾃ､ ja lﾃｶytﾃ､ﾃ､ algoritmin kaikkien ainesosien polariteetit. Tyﾃｶssﾃ､mme kﾃ､ytetﾃ､ﾃ､n funktiosovellusta vastaavaa tunnettua polarisaatioperiaatetta, jota olemme laajentaneet tyypin nostamisen ja koostumuksen periaatteilla. Tarjoamme algoritmin, joka laajentaa van Benthemin polaarisuusmerkintﾃ､algoritmia. Keskustelemme siitﾃ､, miten jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme toimii kﾃ､ytﾃ､nnﾃｶssﾃ､ C&C-parserin avulla.', 'cs': 'Tento článek ukazuje, jak vzít parse stromy v CCG a algoritmicky najít polarity všech složek. Naše práce využívá známý princip polarizace odpovídající aplikaci funkcí, který jsme rozšířili o principy zvyšování typu a složení. Poskytujeme algoritmus, který rozšiřuje algoritmus značení polarity van Benthem. Diskutujeme, jak náš systém funguje v praxi, přijímáme vstupy z C&C parseru.', 'ca': "Aquest article mostra com analitzar arbres en GCC i trobar algorítmicament les polaritats de tots els components. La nostra feina utilitza el conegut principi de polarizació que correspon a l'aplicació de funció, i ho hem extinguit amb principis de creació de tipus i composició. Ens proporcionem un algoritme, ampliant l'algoritme de marcació de polaritat de van Benthem. Discutem com funciona el nostre sistema en la pràctica, prenent input del C&C analizador.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek prikazuje, kako razčleniti drevesa v CCG in algoritmsko najti polarnosti vseh sestavin. Naše delo uporablja dobro znano polarizacijsko načelo, ki ustreza funkcijski aplikaciji, in smo ga razširili z načeli za dvigovanje tipa in kompozicijo. Nudimo algoritem, ki razširi polarnostni algoritem Van Benthema. Razpravljamo o tem, kako naš sistem deluje v praksi, pri čemer upoštevamo prispevke razčlenjevalnika C&C.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na nuna jinin ka sami itãcen parse cikin CCG kuma ka sami karatun takardar duk mataimaki. Kaimarmu yana amfani da kimar zararini da aka sani yana mai daidai da shiryoyin ayuka na aikin aiki, kuma mun buɗe wannan da aka ƙayyade karãtun masu tsari da samu'i. Munã sami algoritm, kuma Muke shimfiɗa algoritm na van Binsu. Munã jãyayya a kan jinsi na'urarmu ke aiki a cikin aikin da ke samun inputi daga mai zartar da C.C.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מראה איך לקחת עצי מעבדה ב CCG ולמצוא אלגוריתמית את הקוטבים של כל הבחירים. העבודה שלנו משתמשת בעקרון הפולריזציה הידוע המתאים לתוכנית הפונקציה, ואנחנו הרחבנו את זה עם עקרונות לגידול סוגים ומרכיב. אנחנו מספקים אלגוריתם, שמאריך את אלגוריתם סימני הקוטב של ואן בנים. אנחנו מדברים על איך המערכת שלנו עובדת באימון, לוקחים תוצאות מהמעבד C&C.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki dipontrolaké kelompok punika dipunangé kapan ning CG karo Algorithm Awak dhéwé ngéwé ngerasakno ning ngerasakno polalisation sing bisa nggawe aplikasi karo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Ketokan karo Ketokan karo nggawe We nyimpen Algorithm, ndheke polarity dianggambar Awak dhéwé pisan piye sistem sing gagal ning pratik, nggawe input sak cara C&C', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ CCG ནང་གི་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དང་ས Algorithm ས་གནས་སྟངས་ཡོངས་རྫུན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་དགོས་པ ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་polarization་ཀྱི་རྩིས་པ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དང་མཐུན་པ་མཚུངས་ཡོད། We provide an algorithm, extending the polarity marking algorithm of van Benthem. ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ལ་གནད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དོན་ལྟར་བྱེད་པ་དང་C&C་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ནང་ནས་ནང་འདྲེན་པ'}
{'en': 'Halo : Learning Semantics-Aware Representations for Cross-Lingual Information Extraction', 'ar': 'هالو: تمثيلات تعلم الدلالات الواعية لاستخراج المعلومات عبر اللغات', 'es': 'Halo: aprendizaje de representaciones semánticas para la extracción de información en varios idiomas', 'fr': "Halo\xa0: apprentissage de représentations sensibles à la sémantique pour l'extraction d'informations multilingues", 'pt': 'Halo: aprendendo representações semânticas para extração de informações entre idiomas', 'ja': 'Halo ：クロスリンガル情報抽出のための学習セマンティクス-意識表現', 'zh': 'Halo:学于言语信息语义感知', 'hi': 'हेलो: क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सूचना निष्कर्षण के लिए शब्दार्थ-जागरूक अभ्यावेदन सीखना', 'ru': 'Halo: Учебная семантика - Понимание представлений для извлечения кросс-лингвистической информации', 'ga': 'Halo: Séimeantaic Foghlama-Léiríochtaí Feasacha maidir le Eastóscadh Faisnéise Trastheangacha', 'ka': 'ჰალო: Semantics-Aware Representations for Cross-Lingual Information Extraction', 'el': 'Halo: Μάθηση Σημασιολογικών Αντιπροσωπειών για τη Διασγλωσσική Εξόρυξη Πληροφοριών', 'hu': 'Halo: Szemantika-tudatos képviseletek tanulása a nyelvközi információk kivonásához', 'kk': 'Қало: Қарастық тіл мәліметті тарқату үшін семантикалық түсініктерді үйрену', 'it': "Halo: Imparare le rappresentazioni semantiche per l'estrazione di informazioni interlinguistiche", 'mk': 'Ало: Научи семантични претставувања за екстракција на меѓујазички информации', 'lt': 'Halo: Semantinių atstovybių mokymasis tarpkalbinei informacijai gauti', 'ms': 'Halo: Belajar Perwakilan Semantik-Awas untuk Ekstraksi Maklumat Selasa-Bahasa', 'ml': 'ഹാലോ: ക്രോസ്- ലിന്\u200dഗുവല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സെമാന്റിക്സ് അറിയുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക', 'mt': "Halo: Tagħlim ta' Rappreżentazzjonijiet Semantiċi Konxji għall-Estrazzjoni ta' Informazzjoni Translingwali", 'mn': 'Хало: Хөгжлийн мэдээлэл татгалзах Semantics-Aware Representations for Cross-Lingual Information Extraction', 'no': 'Halo: Læring av semiantikk-vekk-representasjonar for ekstraksjon av krysslingsinformasjon', 'pl': 'Halo: Uczenie się Semantyki-świadome reprezentacje dla ekstrakcji informacji między językami', 'sr': 'Halo: Učivanje semantičkih znanja predstavljanja za ekstrakciju krstoLingualnih informacija', 'ro': 'Halo: Învățarea reprezentărilor conștiente de semantică pentru extragerea informațiilor translingvistice', 'si': 'හැලෝ: ක්\u200dරොස් ලින්ගුවාල් තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය සඳහා සෙමාන්ටික්ස් අවස්ථාව ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': 'Halo: Learning Semantics-aware Representations of Cross-Lingual Information Extraction', 'ur': 'ہلو: کروس لینگئال معلومات اخراج کے لئے سیمانٹیکس-Aware Representations سکھائی', 'sv': 'Halo: Att lära sig semantiska representationer för tvärspråklig informationsutvinning', 'ta': 'ஹாலோ: க்ராஸ்- மொழி தகவல் வெளியீட்டுக்கான செமான்டிக்ஸ் அறிவான பிரதிநிகழ்வுகளை கற்றுக்கொள்வது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Halo: Truyền thuyết Trung học... Phát triển Thông tin xuyên ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Хало: Учене на семантични представителства за извличане на междулингвистична информация', 'nl': 'Halo: Het leren van semantisch-bewuste representaties voor crosslinguale informatie extractie', 'da': 'Halo: Learning Semantics-Aware Representations for Cross-Lingual Information Extraction', 'hr': 'Halo: Učenje semantičkih znanja predstavljanja za izvlačenje preko jezika informacija', 'de': 'Halo: Semantik-bewusste Darstellungen für die sprachübergreifende Informationsextraktion lernen', 'ko': 'Halo: 학습의 의미 감지의 다중 언어 정보 추출 표시', 'id': 'Halo: Belajar Perwakilan Semantik-Aware untuk Ekstraksi Informasi Selasa Linguan', 'fa': 'هالو: یاد گرفتن نمایندگان سامانتیک آگاهی برای اخراج اطلاعات متوسط زبان', 'sw': 'Halo: Kujifunza maoni yanayofahamika kwa ajili ya kutengeneza taarifa za lugha-lugha', 'tr': 'Halo:Çapraz Bilgi Çıkarması için Semantics-Aware Temsilleri öğrenmek', 'sq': 'Halo: Mësimi i përfaqësimeve Semantike-të njohura për nxjerrjen e informacionit ndërgjuhësor', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ሁኔታ፦', 'hy': 'Հալո. Սեմանտիկ գիտակցական ներկայացումներ սովորելը', 'az': 'Halo: Çift Dilli Malümatı Çıkarması üçün Semantik-Aware Təşkilatları öyrənmək', 'bn': 'হ্যালো: ক্রস-লিঙ্গুয়াল তথ্য বিনিময়ের জন্য সেমান্টিক্স-পরিচিত প্রতিনিধি শিখানো', 'bs': 'Halo: Učenje semantičkih znanja predstavljanja za izvlačenje krstoLingualnih informacija', 'ca': "Halo: Aprendre representacions de consciència Semàtica per l'extracció d'informació translingüa", 'cs': 'Halo: Učení se sémanticky orientované reprezentace pro extrakci informací mezi jazyky', 'et': 'Halo: Semantika-teadlike esinduste õppimine keeleülese teabe väljavõtmiseks', 'fi': 'Halo: Semantiikkatietoisten edustustojen oppiminen monikielisen tiedon poimimiseen', 'jv': 'Halo: Learning semanti-Awave representations for krus-Lingual information extract', 'ha': 'Halo: Learnin Semantics-known Repositions for Extractin information', 'sk': 'Halo: Učenje semantičnih predstavnikov za medjezikovno pridobivanje informacij', 'he': 'הלו: ללמוד מייצגים סמנטיים מודעים למוציאת מידע בין שפתיים', 'bo': 'Halo: Learning Semantics-Aware Representations for Cross-Lingual Information Extraction'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual information extraction (CLIE) is an important and challenging task, especially in low resource scenarios. To tackle this challenge, we propose a training method, called Halo, which enforces the local region of each hidden state of a neural model to only generate target tokens with the same semantic structure tag. This simple but powerful technique enables a neural model to learn semantics-aware representations that are robust to noise, without introducing any extra parameter, thus yielding better generalization in both high and low resource settings.Halo, which enforces the local region of each hidden state of a neural model\n      to only generate target tokens with the same semantic structure tag. This\n      simple but powerful technique enables a neural model to learn\n      semantics-aware representations that are robust to noise, without\n      introducing any extra parameter, thus yielding better generalization in\n      both high and low resource settings.\n    ', 'ar': 'يعد استخراج المعلومات عبر اللغات (CLIE) مهمة مهمة وصعبة ، خاصة في سيناريوهات الموارد المنخفضة. لمواجهة هذا التحدي ، نقترح طريقة تدريب تسمى Halo ، والتي تفرض المنطقة المحلية لكل حالة مخفية للنموذج العصبي لتوليد الرموز المستهدفة فقط بنفس علامة البنية الدلالية. تتيح هذه التقنية البسيطة والفعالة للنموذج العصبي تعلم التمثيلات المدركة للدلالات والتي تكون قوية للضوضاء ، دون إدخال أي معلمة إضافية ، مما يؤدي إلى تعميم أفضل في كل من إعدادات الموارد العالية والمنخفضة.', 'pt': 'A extração de informações em vários idiomas (CLIE) é uma tarefa importante e desafiadora, especialmente em cenários de poucos recursos. Para enfrentar esse desafio, propomos um método de treinamento, chamado Halo, que impõe a região local de cada estado oculto de um modelo neural para gerar apenas tokens de destino com a mesma tag de estrutura semântica. Essa técnica simples, mas poderosa, permite que um modelo neural aprenda representações com reconhecimento de semântica que são robustas ao ruído, sem introduzir nenhum parâmetro extra, resultando em uma melhor generalização em configurações de recursos altos e baixos.', 'es': 'La extracción de información multilingüe (CLIE) es una tarea importante y desafiante, especialmente en escenarios de bajos recursos. Para hacer frente a este desafío, proponemos un método de entrenamiento, llamado Halo, que obliga a la región local de cada estado oculto de un modelo neuronal a generar solo tokens objetivo con la misma etiqueta de estructura semántica. Esta técnica simple pero potente permite que un modelo neuronal aprenda representaciones con conciencia semántica que son robustas al ruido, sin introducir ningún parámetro adicional, lo que produce una mejor generalización en entornos de recursos altos y bajos.', 'fr': "L'extraction d'informations multilingues (CLIE) est une tâche importante et difficile, en particulier dans les scénarios de faibles ressources. Pour relever ce défi, nous proposons une méthode d'apprentissage, appelée Halo, qui applique la région locale de chaque état caché d'un modèle neuronal afin de générer uniquement des jetons cibles avec la même étiquette de structure sémantique. Cette technique simple mais puissante permet à un modèle neuronal d'apprendre des représentations sensibles à la sémantique qui sont robustes au bruit, sans introduire de paramètre supplémentaire, ce qui permet une meilleure généralisation dans les paramètres de ressources élevées et faibles.", 'ja': 'クロスリンガルインフォメーション抽出（ CLIE ）は、特にリソースの少ないシナリオにおいて、重要で困難なタスクです。この課題に取り組むために、私たちはHaloと呼ばれるトレーニング方法を提案します。これは、ニューラルモデルの各隠れた状態のローカル領域を強制して、同じ意味構造タグを持つターゲットトークンのみを生成します。この単純だが強力な手法により、ニューラルモデルは、余分なパラメータを導入することなく、ノイズに対して堅牢な意味認識表現を学習することができ、したがって、高リソース設定と低リソース設定の両方でより良い一般化をもたらします。', 'zh': '语言信息提取 (CLIE) 一重而有挑战性之任,尤在资源匮乏。 为此挑战,有Halo之训练方法,制神经隐形之域,同语义之令牌。 此简而功能强大之术使神经形能学语义感知,此噪声之壮也,而无引于参数,而生于高低资源之泛化。', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सूचना निष्कर्षण (CLIE) एक महत्वपूर्ण और चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है, विशेष रूप से कम संसाधन परिदृश्यों में। इस चुनौती से निपटने के लिए, हम एक प्रशिक्षण विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे हेलो कहा जाता है, जो तंत्रिका मॉडल के प्रत्येक छिपे हुए राज्य के स्थानीय क्षेत्र को लागू करता है ताकि केवल एक ही शब्दार्थ संरचना टैग के साथ लक्ष्य टोकन उत्पन्न किया जा सके। यह सरल लेकिन शक्तिशाली तकनीक एक तंत्रिका मॉडल को शब्दार्थ-जागरूक अभ्यावेदन सीखने में सक्षम बनाती है जो शोर के लिए मजबूत हैं, बिना किसी अतिरिक्त पैरामीटर को पेश किए, इस प्रकार उच्च और निम्न संसाधन सेटिंग्स दोनों में बेहतर सामान्यीकरण उत्पन्न करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Кросс-лингвистическое извлечение информации (CLIE) является важной и сложной задачей, особенно в сценариях с ограниченными ресурсами. Для решения этой задачи мы предлагаем метод обучения, называемый Halo, который обеспечивает локальную область каждого скрытого состояния нейронной модели только для генерации целевых токенов с одним и тем же тегом семантической структуры. Этот простой, но мощный метод позволяет нейронной модели изучать семантические представления, которые устойчивы к шуму, без введения каких-либо дополнительных параметров, что дает лучшее обобщение как в условиях высоких, так и низких ресурсов.', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach agus dúshlánach é eastóscadh faisnéise tras-teanga (CLIE), go háirithe i gcásanna acmhainní ísle. Chun dul i ngleic leis an dúshlán seo, molaimid modh oiliúna, ar a dtugtar Halo, a fhorfheidhmíonn réigiún áitiúil de gach stát folaithe de shamhail néarúil chun spriocchomharthaí a ghiniúint leis an gclib struchtúir shéimeantaigh chéanna amháin. Cuireann an teicníocht shimplí ach chumhachtach seo ar chumas samhail néarúil léiriúcháin atá feasach ar shéimeantaic a fhoghlaim atá láidir don torann, gan aon pharaiméadar breise a thabhairt isteach, rud a thugann ginearálú níos fearr i suíomhanna acmhainní ard agus íseal araon.', 'ka': 'მრავალური ინფორმაციის ექსტრექცია (CLIE) არის მნიშვნელოვანი და შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა, განსაკუთრებით მარტივი რესურსის სინარიოში. ამ გამოცდილების გარეშე, ჩვენ მინდომებით გავაკეთებთ განსწავლების მეტი, რომელიც ჰალო, რომელიც ყველა ნეიროლური მოდელის მხოლოდ მხოლოდ იგივე სიმენტიკური სტრუქტურაციის ჭდელით მ ეს მარტივია, მაგრამ ძალიან ტექნექცია შესაძლებელია ნეიროლური მოდელის გასწავლა სმენტიკური გამოსახულებები, რომლებიც ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან, რომლებიც არაფერი პარამეტრების გადატანა', 'el': 'Η εκχύλιση γλωσσών πληροφοριών (CLIE) είναι ένα σημαντικό και προκλητικό έργο, ειδικά σε σενάρια χαμηλών πόρων. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτή η πρόκληση, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο εκπαίδευσης, που ονομάζεται Halo, η οποία επιβάλλει την τοπική περιοχή κάθε κρυμμένης κατάστασης ενός νευρωνικού μοντέλου να παράγει μόνο σήματα στόχων με την ίδια σημασιολογική δομή ετικέτα. Αυτή η απλή αλλά ισχυρή τεχνική επιτρέπει σε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο να μάθει σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις που είναι ανθεκτικές στο θόρυβο, χωρίς να εισάγει καμία επιπλέον παράμετρο, αποδίδοντας έτσι καλύτερη γενίκευση τόσο σε υψηλές όσο και σε χαμηλές ρυθμίσεις πόρων.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű információkinyerés (CLIE) fontos és kihívást jelentő feladat, különösen alacsony erőforrások esetén. Ennek a kihívásnak a megoldására egy Halo nevű képzési módszert javasolunk, amely egy idegi modell minden rejtett állapotának helyi régióját erősíti, hogy csak azonos szemantikai struktúra címkével rendelkező céltokeneket generáljon. Ez az egyszerű, de erőteljes technika lehetővé teszi az idegi modell szemantika-tudatos reprezentációk tanulását, amelyek robusztusak a zajra, anélkül, hogy bármilyen extra paramétert bevezetnénk, így jobb általánosítást eredményezne mind a magas, mind az alacsony erőforrások beállításaiban.', 'it': "L'estrazione di informazioni multilingue (CLIE) è un compito importante e impegnativo, soprattutto in scenari a basso contenuto di risorse. Per affrontare questa sfida, proponiamo un metodo di formazione, chiamato Halo, che impone la regione locale di ogni stato nascosto di un modello neurale per generare token target con lo stesso tag di struttura semantica. Questa tecnica semplice ma potente consente a un modello neurale di apprendere rappresentazioni semantiche-consapevoli che sono robuste al rumore, senza introdurre alcun parametro aggiuntivo, ottenendo così una migliore generalizzazione sia in impostazioni di risorse elevate che basse.", 'lt': 'Kelių kalbų informacijos gavimas (CLIE) yra svarbus ir sunkus uždavinys, ypač mažų išteklių scenarijų atveju. Siekiant spręsti šį uždavinį, siūlome mokymo metodą, vadinamą Halo, kuris priverstų kiekvienos paslėptos nervų modelio būklės vietinį region ą sukurti tik tikslinius ženklus su ta pačia semantine struktūra. Šis paprastas, bet galingas metodas leidžia nerviniam modeliui mokytis semantiškai suvokiamų reprezentacijų, kurios yra patikimos triukšmui, nenurodant jokių papildomų parametrų, taip užtikrinant geresnę generalizaciją tiek didelių, tiek mažų išteklių aplinkybėse.', 'kk': 'Тілді мәліметтерді тарқату (CLIE) маңызды және көмектесу тапсырмасы, осымен қатар көмектесу сценарияларында. Бұл өзгерістерді шешу үшін біз Halo деп аталатын оқыту әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл невралдық моделінің жергілікті аумағын тек бір семантикалық құрылғы тегті белгілерді жасау үшін негізгі белгіле Бұл кәдімгі, бірақ күшті техника невралдық моделі, дыбыс үшін күшті симантикалық түсініктерді үйренуге мүмкіндік береді, сондықтан қосымша параметрлерді келтірмей, көп, төмен ресурстардың параметрлерін', 'mk': 'Cross-lingual information extraction (CLIE) is an important and challenging task, especially in low resource scenarios.  За да го решиме овој предизвик, предложуваме метод на обука, наречен Хало, кој го принуди локалниот регион на секоја скриена состојба на нервен модел да генерира само метни знаци со иста семантична структурна тага. Оваа едноставна, но моќна техника овозможува нервен модел да научи семантични претставувања кои се силни за бучава, без воведување на никаков дополнителен параметр, со што ќе се предизвика подобра генерализација во поставувањата на високи и ниски ресурси.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi maklumat saling bahasa (CLIE) adalah tugas yang penting dan mencabar, terutama dalam skenario sumber rendah. Untuk menghadapi cabaran ini, kami cadangkan kaedah latihan, bernama Halo, yang memaksa kawasan tempatan setiap keadaan tersembunyi model saraf hanya menghasilkan token sasaran dengan tag struktur semantik yang sama. This simple but powerful technique enables a neural model to learn semantics-aware representations that are robust to noise, without introducing any extra parameter, thus yielding better generalization in both high and low resource settings.', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എടുക്കുക (CLIE) ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളാണ്, വിശേഷിച്ച് വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള ഈ ചോദ്യത്തെ എതിര്\u200dത്താന്\u200d, ഹാലോ എന്ന പേരുള്ള ഒരു ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊജക്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന ഓരോ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെയും പ്രാദേശിക ഈ എളുപ്പമുള്ള പക്ഷെ ശക്തിയുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഒരു സാങ്കേതികമായ മോഡലിന് സാധ്യതയുണ്ട്. അതുകൊണ', 'mt': 'Cross-lingual information extraction (CLIE) is an important and challenging task, especially in low resource scenarios.  Biex nindirizzaw din l-isfida, nipproponu metodu ta’ taħriġ, imsejjaħ Halo, li jinforza r-reġjun lokali ta’ kull stat moħbi ta’ mudell newrali biex jiġġenera biss tokens fil-mira bl-istess tikketta ta’ struttura semantika. Din it-teknika sempliċi iżda b’saħħitha tippermetti mudell newrali jitgħallem rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi li huma sodi għall-istorbju, mingħajr ma jintroduċi l-ebda parametru addizzjonali, u b’hekk twassal għal ġeneralizzazzjoni a ħjar kemm f’ambjenti ta’ riżorsi għoljin kif ukoll baxxi.', 'mn': 'Дөрвөн хэл мэдээлэл татах (CLIE) нь чухал, шаардлагатай ажил, ялангуяа бага нөөцийн хувилбарт. Энэ сорилтыг зогсоохын тулд бид Хало гэдэг сургалтын арга загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь мэдрэлийн загвар бүрийн нууцтай байр суурь нууцтай байр суурь нууцтай байр суурь бүрийг зөвхөн зориулагдсан зориулагдсан тэмд Энэ энгийн боловч хүчирхэг техник сэтгэл зүйн загвар нь дуу хөдөлгөөнд хүчирхэг, нэмэлт параметр тайлбарлахгүйгээр суралцах боломжтой болгодог. Иймээс өндөр болон бага нөөцийн төлөвлөгөөнд илүү өндөр ерөнхийлөгч байдаг', 'no': 'Ekstraksjon av krysspråk- informasjon (CLIE) er ein viktig og vanskeleg oppgåve, spesielt i låge ressursscenarioar. For å løse denne utfordringen, foreslår vi ein øvingsmetode kalla Halo, som påvirkar lokale området av kvar skjulte tilstand i eit neuralmodell for å berre laga målteken med same semantisk strukturmerke. Denne enkle, men kraftige teknikken kan lære eit neiralmodell for å lære semantiske representasjonar som er sterkt til støy, utan å introdusera nokon ekstra parameter, slik at det gjer bedre generellisering i både høge og låge ressursinnstillingar.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja informacji między językami (CLIE) jest ważnym i wymagającym zadaniem, zwłaszcza w scenariuszach niskich zasobów. Aby sprostać temu wyzwaniu, proponujemy metodę treningową zwaną Halo, która wymusza lokalny region każdego ukrytego stanu modelu neuronowego do generowania tylko tokenów docelowych z tym samym znacznikiem struktury semantycznej. Ta prosta, ale potężna technika pozwala modelowi neuronowemu uczyć się przedstawień świadomych semantyki, które są solidne na szum, bez wprowadzania żadnych dodatkowych parametrów, dając tym samym lepsze uogólnienie zarówno w ustawieniach wysokich, jak i niskich zasobów.', 'ro': 'Extragerea informațiilor translingvistice (CLIE) este o sarcină importantă și provocatoare, în special în scenariile cu resurse reduse. Pentru a aborda această provocare, propunem o metodă de instruire, numită Halo, care impune regiunea locală a fiecărei stări ascunse a unui model neural pentru a genera doar jetoane țintă cu aceeași etichetă de structură semantică. Această tehnică simplă, dar puternică permite unui model neural să învețe reprezentări conștiente de semantică care sunt robuste la zgomot, fără a introduce nici un parametru suplimentar, oferind astfel o mai bună generalizare atât în setările de resurse ridicate, cât și reduse.', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවික තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය (CLIE) වැදගත් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා, විශේෂයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩුම ස මේ අභ්\u200dයානයක් සටන් කරන්න, අපි හැලෝ කියන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් හැලෝ කියලා හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ හැම ප්\u200dරශ මේ සරල නමුත් ශක්තිමත් තාක්ෂණය සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා සෙමැන්ටික් අවධානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, ශක්තිමත් වෙනුවෙන් කිසිම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නැතුව, ඉතින් උඩ', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig informationsutvinning (CLIE) är en viktig och utmanande uppgift, särskilt i scenarier med låga resurser. För att tackla denna utmaning föreslår vi en träningsmetod, kallad Halo, som tvingar den lokala regionen av varje dold tillstånd i en neural modell att endast generera måltokens med samma semantiska strukturtagg. Denna enkla men kraftfulla teknik gör det möjligt för en neural modell att lära sig semantiskt medvetna representationer som är robusta för buller, utan att införa någon extra parameter, vilket ger bättre generalisering i både höga och låga resursinställningar.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija preko jezika informacija (CLIE) je važan i izazovan zadatak, posebno u nizim scenarijima resursa. Za rješavanje ovog izazova predlažemo metodu obuke Halo, koja prisiljava lokalnu regiju svakog skrivenog stanja neuralnog model a da samo stvori ciljne znakove sa istim semantičkim znakovima strukture. Ova jednostavna, ali moćna tehnika omogućava neuralni model da nauči semantičke predstave koje su snažne za buku, bez predstavljanja dodatnih parametara, tako da pruža bolju generalizaciju u visokim i niskim nastavama resursa.', 'so': 'Ka baxsashada macluumaadka luuqadaha iskutallaabta ah (CLIE) waa muhiim iyo dhibaatooyin leh, khusuusan ku jirto aragtida hoose ee ay ku jirto. Si aan u tacliino dhibaatadan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab waxbarasho la odhan jiray Halo, kaas oo ku xoogaysaa gobolka deegaanka oo dhan oo qarsoon oo ah model neuro ah si ay u dhashaan calaamado jimicsiga oo keliya oo ku sameynaya alaabta dhismaha isku mid ah. Teknooniyadan sahlan laakiin xoogga badan waxay awoodaa in ay barto noocyo caqli ah oo loo yaqaan qaylada, oo aan la soo bandhigayn parameter dheer, oo taas darteed waxay sameyn kartaa dhaqan ka wanaagsan xarunta nololeedka sare iyo hoose.', 'ta': 'கிருஸ்- மொழி தகவல் வெளியீடு (CLIE) ஒரு முக்கியமான மற்றும் சவாலிக்கும் பணி இந்த சவால்களை எதிர்பார்க்க நாம் ஒரு பயிற்சி முறைமையை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம், ஹாலோ, அது ஒவ்வொரு மறைந்த நிலையின் உள்ளமைப்பு மாதிரியிலும் ஒரே  இந்த சுலபமான ஆனால் சக்தியுடைய தொழில்நுட்பம் உயர்ந்த மற்றும் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் அமைப்புகளிலும் சிறந்த உருவாக்கத்தை கொடுக்கும் போது பாதிப்பு அறிவ', 'ur': 'Cross-language information extraction (CLIE) ایک اہم اور مشکل کام ہے، مخصوصاً کم منبع سناریوں میں۔ اس چال کے ساتھ ہم ایک تدریس طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو ہلو کا نام ہے، جس نے ہر مخفی منطقه کی نائرول موڈل کی محلی منطقه کو صرف ایک سیمنٹی ساختار ٹاگ کے ساتھ موجود ٹوکنوں کو پیدا کرنے کے لئے مطابق کرتا ہے. یہ سادہ لیکن طاقتور تکنیک ایک نیورل موڈل کو سیکھنے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے کہ سیمانٹیکوں کی آگاہ ہوئی تصاویرات کو سیکھ سکیں جو آواز کے لئے مضبوط ہیں، اور کسی اضافہ پارامتر کو معلوم نہ کریں، یہاں سے اچھی اور کمی سرمایہ کے سازوں میں بہتر عمومی', 'uz': "Cross-lingual information extraction (CLIE) is an important and challenging task, especially in low resource scenarios.  Bu murakkablarni boshqarish uchun, Halo deb nomlangan, har bir bekitilgan holatning lokal darajadagi murakkab modelini faqat bir semantik struktur tegi bilan ishlab chiqarish mumkin. Bu oddiy, lekin mezar texnologiya, qaytarishni o'rganish uchun semantikki taʼminlovchi shakllarni o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganish mumkin. Shunday qilib qo'shimcha parametrlarni ishlatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác thông tin xuyên ngôn ngữ là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng và khó khăn, đặc biệt trong viễn cảnh các tài nguyên thấp. Để giải quyết thử thách này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp huấn luyện, gọi là Halo, mà củng cố vùng địa phương của mỗi mô hình thần kinh bị giấu chỉ để tạo ra những hiệu ứng với cùng một thẻ cấu trúc ngữ pháp. Một kỹ thuật đơn giản nhưng mạnh mẽ này cho phép mô hình thần kinh học các biểu hiện theo ý thức thì chắc chắn về tiếng ồn, mà không cần thêm bất kỳ tham số nào, để có thể tổng hợp tốt hơn trong thiết lập nguyên liệu cao và thấp.', 'nl': "Cross-lingual information extraction (CLIE) is een belangrijke en uitdagende taak, vooral in scenario's met weinig middelen. Om deze uitdaging aan te pakken, stellen we een trainingsmethode voor, genaamd Halo, die de lokale regio van elke verborgen toestand van een neuraal model dwingt om alleen doeltokens te genereren met dezelfde semantische structuur tag. Deze eenvoudige maar krachtige techniek stelt een neuraal model in staat om semantische bewuste representaties te leren die robuust zijn tegen ruis, zonder enige extra parameter in te voeren, waardoor een betere generalisatie wordt verkregen in zowel hoge als lage resource instellingen.", 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija preko jezika informacija (CLIE) je važan i izazovan zadatak, posebno u nizim scenarijima resursa. Za rješavanje ovog izazova predlažemo metodu obuke po imenu Halo, koja primjenjuje lokalnu regiju svakog skrivenog stanja neuralnog model a samo da stvori ciljne znakove sa istim semantičkim znakovima strukture. Ova jednostavna, ali moćna tehnika omogućava neuronski model naučiti predstavljanja svjesne semantike koje su snažne za buku, bez uvođenja dodatnih parametara, tako da pruža bolju generalizaciju u visokim i niskim nastavama resursa.', 'da': 'Krydsproget informationsudvinding (CLIE) er en vigtig og udfordrende opgave, især i scenarier med lave ressourcer. For at tackle denne udfordring foreslår vi en træningsmetode, kaldet Halo, som håndhæver den lokale region af hver skjult tilstand af en neural model til kun at generere mål tokens med samme semantiske struktur tag. Denne enkle, men kraftfulde teknik gør det muligt for en neural model at lære semantisk bevidste repræsentationer, der er robuste over for støj, uden at indføre nogen ekstra parameter, hvilket giver bedre generalisering i både høje og lave ressourcer indstillinger.', 'de': 'Die sprachübergreifende Informationsextraktion (CLIE) ist eine wichtige und herausfordernde Aufgabe, insbesondere in ressourcenarmen Szenarien. Um diese Herausforderung anzugehen, schlagen wir eine Trainingsmethode namens Halo vor, die die lokale Region jedes versteckten Zustandes eines neuronalen Modells erzwingt, nur Target Tokens mit demselben semantischen Struktur-Tag zu generieren. Diese einfache, aber leistungsstarke Technik ermöglicht es einem neuronalen Modell, semantisch-bewusste Repräsentationen zu lernen, die robust gegen Rauschen sind, ohne zusätzliche Parameter einzuführen, wodurch eine bessere Verallgemeinerung sowohl bei hohen als auch niedrigen Ressourceneinstellungen erzielt wird.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi informasi saling bahasa (CLIE) adalah tugas yang penting dan menantang, terutama dalam skenario sumber daya rendah. Untuk mengatasi tantangan ini, kami mengusulkan metode latihan, bernama Halo, yang memaksa wilayah lokal setiap negara tersembunyi model saraf untuk hanya menghasilkan token sasaran dengan tag struktur semantis yang sama. Teknik sederhana tapi kuat ini memungkinkan model saraf untuk belajar representation semantik-sadar yang kuat terhadap kebisingan, tanpa memperkenalkan parameter ekstra apapun, sehingga menyebabkan generalisasi yang lebih baik dalam kedua pengaturan sumber daya tinggi dan rendah.', 'fa': 'اخراج اطلاعات مختلف زبان (CLIE) یک کار مهم و مشکل است، مخصوصا در صحنه\u200cهای منابع کم. برای حل این چالش، ما یک روش آموزش پیشنهاد می کنیم، به نام هالو، که منطقه محلی هر وضعیت مخفی از یک مدل عصبی را تأثیر می دهد تا فقط نشانه های هدف را با یک نقشه ساختار سیمانی تولید کند. این تکنیک ساده ولی قدرتمند به یک مدل عصبی اجازه می دهد که نمایش\u200cهای آگاهی از سنتی\u200cها را یاد بگیرد که به صوت قوی هستند، بدون معرفی پارامتر اضافه\u200cای، به این نتیجه در تنظیمات منابع\u200cهای بالا و پایین بهتر از آن می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '크로스 언어 정보 추출(CLIE)은 특히 자원이 부족한 상황에서 중요하고 도전적인 임무이다.이 도전에 대응하기 위해 우리는 Halo라고 불리는 훈련 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 신경모형의 모든 숨겨진 상태의 국부 구역에 같은 의미 구조의 표기를 가진 목표 표기만 생성하도록 강요한다.이런 간단하지만 기능이 강한 기술은 신경모델로 하여금 소음 노봉에 대한 의미 감지 표시를 배울 수 있게 하고 어떠한 추가 파라미터를 도입하지 않아도 고자원과 저자원 환경에서 더욱 좋은 범위화를 형성할 수 있게 한다.', 'sw': 'Utoa wa taarifa za lugha (CLIE) ni kazi muhimu na changamoto, hasa katika hali ya chini ya rasilimali. Ili kukabiliana na changamoto hili, tunapendekeza mbinu ya mafunzo, inayoitwa Halo, ambayo inathibitisha eneo la kila jimbo lililofichikana na mtindo wa kiserikali tu wa kutengeneza alama za malengo kwa alama moja ya miundombinu ya kigaidi. This simple but powerful technique enables a neural model to learn semantics-aware representations that are robust to noise, without introducing any extra parameter, thus yielding better generalization in both high and low resource settings.', 'tr': '횉apraz diller bilgi tapmaky (CLIE) m철h체m we 챌철z체mli t채sirdir, 첵철ne i흫 az resurslar senary첵asynda. Bu kyn챌ylyky 챌철zmek 체챌in Halo adyny흫 첵erli b철legini neural modelini흫 첵철ne bir semantik struktury흫 t채gi bilen maksady tokatlaryny d철retmek 체챌in teklip ed첵채ris. Bu basit 첵철ne g체첵챌li teknik, n채ral modelini흫 semantik bilen g체첵챌li ses 챌ykmasyny 철wrenmesine m체mkin ed첵채r, bu seb채bi gaty bir parameter 체첵tgetmeden, bu seb채pden hem 첵okary hem 첵okary 챌e힊me d체z체mlerinde gowy generalizasyny etm채ge m체mkin ed첵채r.', 'bg': 'Междуезичното извличане на информация (CLIE) е важна и предизвикателна задача, особено при сценарии с ниски ресурси. За да се справим с това предизвикателство, предлагаме метод на обучение, наречен Хало, който налага локалния регион на всяко скрито състояние на невронния модел да генерира само целеви токени със същия семантичен маркер структура. Тази проста, но мощна техника позволява на невронния модел да научи семантично-съзнателни представи, които са здрави на шум, без да въвежда допълнителен параметър, като по този начин дава по-добра обобщаване както при настройки с висок, така и с нисък ресурс.', 'af': "Kruistale inligting uitvoer (CLIE) is 'n belangrike en uitgelykende taak, veral in lae hulpbron scenarios. Om hierdie uitdrukking te probeer, voorstel ons 'n oefening metode, genaamd Halo, wat die plaaslike region van elke verborge staat van 'n neurale model vervul om slegs doel tokens te genereer met dieselfde semantiese struktuur etiket. Hierdie eenvoudige, maar kragtige teknike laat 'n neurale model toe om semantieke-bewyse voorstellings te leer wat kragtig is na ruis, sonder om enige ekstra parameter te introduseer, sodat beter generalisering in beide hoë en lae hulpbron instellings te gee.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መረጃ ማውጣት (CLIE) የተጠቃሚ እና የሚያቃልል ስራ ነው፤ በተለየ ትንሽ የክፍለ ዕቃ ታሪክ ነው። ይህንን ጥቃት ለመቀናቀል፣ ሐሎ የተሰወረውን የአካባቢውን ክፍል፣ የተሰወረውን የአካባቢውን አካባቢ አካባቢ አካል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ይህ ቀላል ነገር ግን ኃይለኛ የናውሬው ሞዴል ድምፅ ለማስተማር ይችላል፡፡', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e informacionit ndërgjuhësor (CLIE) është një detyrë e rëndësishme dhe sfiduese, veçan ërisht në skenarët e ulët të burimeve. Për të trajtuar këtë sfidë, propozojmë një metodë stërvitjeje të quajtur Halo, e cila zbaton rajonin lokal të çdo shteti të fshehtë të modelit nervor për të gjeneruar vetëm shenjat objektiv me të njëjtin shenjë strukturore semantike. Kjo teknikë e thjeshtë por e fuqishme lejon një model nervor të mësojë përfaqësime të vetëdijshme semantike që janë të forta ndaj zhurmës, pa paraqitur ndonjë parametrë shtesë, duke dhënë kështu gjeneralizatë më të mirë në rregullimet e burimeve të larta dhe të ulta.', 'hy': 'Լեզուների միջև տեղեկատվության վերացումը (CILE) կարևոր և դժվար խնդիր է, հատկապես ցածր ռեսուրսների սցենարներում: Այս մարտահրավերի լուծման համար մենք առաջարկում ենք մի ուսուցման մեթոդ, որը կոչվում է Halo, որը ստիպում է նյարդային մոդելի յուրաքանչյուր թաքնված վիճակի տեղական հատվածը միայն ստեղծել նպատակային նշաններ, որոնք նույն սեմանտիկ կառուցվածքի ն Այս պարզ, բայց հզոր տեխնիկան հնարավորություն է տալիս նյարդային մոդելին սովորել սեմանտիկական գիտակցական ներկայացումներ, որոնք հզոր են աղմուկի համար, առանց ներկայացնելու որևէ ավելին պարամետր, ինչը ավելի լավ ընդհանուր է տալիս բարձր և ցածր ռեսուրսների միջ', 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষায় তথ্য বের করা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এবং চ্যালেঞ্জের কাজ, বিশেষ করে কম সম্পদের দৃশ্যে। এই চ্যালেঞ্জের মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা একটি প্রশিক্ষণ পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, যার নাম হ্যালো, যা প্রত্যেক লুকিয়ে রাষ্ট্রের স্থানীয় অঞ্চলের একটি নিউরেল This simple but powerful technique enables a neural model to learn semantics-aware representations that are robust to noise, without introducing any extra parameter, thus yielding better generalization in both high and low resource settings.', 'az': 'Çox dilli məlumat ekstraksiyası (CLIE) mövcuddur və çətin bir iş, özellikle də düşük ressurs scenariyalarında. Bu çətinliklə çəkilmək üçün Halo adlı təhsil metodlarını təklif edirik ki, hər nöral modelinin gizli durumunun yerli bölgesini yalnız aynı semantik quruluş etiketi ilə məqsəd işaretlərini yaratmaq üçün təhsil edir. Bu basit fakat güclü tekniklər, səslə güclü olan semantik təsirlərini öyrənməyə imkan verir, heç bir əlavə parametrləri tanıtmadan, böylece yüksək və düşük ressurs təsirlərində daha yaxşı generalizasyon verər.', 'ca': "L'extracció de informació translingüística (CLIE) és una tasca important i desafiadora, especialment en escenaris de baix recursos. Per enfrontar aquest repte, proposem un mètode d'entrenament anomenat Halo, que força la regió local de cada estat ocult d'un model neural només per generar fitxes d'objectiu amb la mateixa etiqueta d'estructura semàntica. Aquesta tècnica senzilla però poderosa permet a un model neuronal aprendre representacions conscients de la semàntica que són robustes al soroll, sense introduir cap paràmetre extra, generant així una millor generalització tant en ambients de recursos alts com baixos.", 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija preko jezika informacija (CLIE) je važan i izazovan zadatak, posebno u nizim scenarijima resursa. Za rješavanje ovog izazova predlažemo metodu obuke Halo, koja primjenjuje lokalnu regiju svakog skrivenog stanja neuralnog model a samo da stvori ciljne znakove sa istim semantičkim znakovima strukture. Ova jednostavna, ali moćna tehnika omogućava neuralni model da nauči predstavljanje semantičkog svjesnog znanja koje su snažne na buku, bez uvođenja dodatnih parametara, tako da pruža bolju generalizaciju u visokim i niskim nastavama resursa.', 'cs': 'Extrakce informací mezi jazyky (CLIE) je důležitým a náročným úkolem, zejména v případě scénářů s nízkými zdroji. Pro řešení této výzvy navrhujeme tréninkovou metodu nazvanou Halo, která vynucuje lokální oblast každého skrytého stavu neuronového modelu k generování cílových tokenů se stejnou značkou sémantické struktury. Tato jednoduchá, ale výkonná technika umožňuje neuronovému modelu naučit se sémanticky vědomé reprezentace, které jsou robustní vůči šumu, aniž by zavedly žádné další parametry, což přináší lepší zobecnění jak v nastavení vysokých, tak nízkých zdrojů.', 'et': 'Keeleülene teabe hankimine (CLIE) on oluline ja keeruline ülesanne, eriti vähese ressursiga stsenaariumides. Selle väljakutse lahendamiseks pakume välja koolitusmeetodi nimega Halo, mis rakendab neuromudeli iga peidetud oleku kohalikku piirkonda, et luua ainult sama semantilise struktuuri sildiga sihtmärke. See lihtne, kuid võimas tehnika võimaldab närvimudelil õppida semantika-teadlikke esitusi, mis on vastupidavad mürale, lisaparameetreid lisamata, andes seega parema üldistamise nii suure kui ka madala ressursi seadetes.', 'fi': 'Monikielinen tiedonhankinta (CLIE) on tärkeä ja haastava tehtävä erityisesti vähävaraisissa skenaarioissa. Haasteeseen vastaamiseksi ehdotamme harjoitusmenetelmää nimeltä Halo, joka pakottaa neuromallin jokaisen piilotetun tilan paikallisen alueen tuottamaan vain kohdemerkkejä, joilla on sama semanttinen rakenne tagi. Tämän yksinkertaisen mutta tehokkaan tekniikan avulla neuromalli oppii semantiikkatietoisia esityksiä, jotka ovat kestäviä kohinan suhteen ilman lisäparametreja, mikä tuottaa paremman yleistymisen sekä korkean että matalan resurssin asetuksissa.', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates Ngawe nggawe mungkin nggo kowe nggawe balêr iki, kita supoyo nggawe maneh karo Halo, sing nyimpen lokal sistem sing gawe barang sistem kehidupan sistem sing apik dhéwé model sing nyimpen tarjamahan kanggo ngelaran token nggo sabên seneng sampek sematik dadi. Iyo sampeyan sistem sing perusahaan, iso disenyakake sistem Neral kanggo ngerasah semanti-alam sing bisa mbaar nggawe barang kejahatan, lan akeh iso nggawe parameter sing apik dhéwé, dadi iso nggawe nguasah luwih apik lan alam sing bisa diagonalan tambah bantuan.', 'sk': 'Medjezično pridobivanje informacij (CLIE) je pomembna in zahtevna naloga, zlasti v scenarijih z nizkimi viri. Za reševanje tega izziva predlagamo metodo usposabljanja, imenovano Halo, ki uveljavlja lokalno območje vsakega skritega stanja nevronskega modela za ustvarjanje ciljnih žetonov z isto semantično strukturo oznake. Ta preprosta, vendar zmogljiva tehnika omogoča nevralnemu modelu, da se nauči semantično zavedajočih se predstavitev, ki so robustne do šuma, brez uvedbe dodatnih parametrov, kar omogoča boljšo generalizacijo tako v nastavitvah visokih kot nizkih virov.', 'he': 'חיפוש מידע בין שפתיים (CLIE) הוא משימה חשובה ומתאגרת, במיוחד בתרחישות משאבים נמוכים. כדי להתמודד עם האתגר הזה, אנו מציעים שיטת אימון, שנקראת הלו, שמכריח את האזור המקומי של כל מדינה מוסתרת של מודל עצבי כדי ליצור רק סימנים מטרה עם אותו תג מבנה סמנטי. This simple but powerful technique enables a neural model to learn semantics-aware representations that are robust to noise, without introducing any extra parameter, thus yielding better generalization in both high and low resource settings.', 'ha': "Extractin information na fassarar-harshe (CLIU) yana da muhimu kuma mai gaura, hasa'a, cikin fassarar masu rauni. To, dõmin ka yi taci ga wannan na'urar, muna buƙata wata metode mai amfani da sunan Halo, wanda ke ƙarani da wuri na lokacin duk halin da aka ɓõye, a cikin motel na neurali don ya iya ƙiƙiro ayuka na goa kawai da tagon na kamata. Wannan tamko mai sauƙi kuma mai ƙarfi yana iya amfani da wata motel mai neural dõmin su sanar masu gaya wa-semantiki waɗand a aka yi riƙon zuwa sauti, kuma bã ya introduce wani parameter ƙari, don ya ƙara shi, kuma yana ƙara ƙarami cikin tsarin mafarin sarki da kuma mafi ƙasƙanci na resource.", 'bo': 'Cross-lingual information extraction (CLIE)is an important and challenging task, especially in low resource scenarios. To tackle this challenge, we propose a training method, called Halo, which enforces the local region of each hidden state of a neural model to only generate target tokens with the same semantic structure tag. This simple but powerful technique enables a neural model to learn semantics-aware representations that are robust to noise, without introducing any extra parameter, thus yielding better generalization in both high and low resource settings.'}
{'en': 'Predicting Word Embeddings Variability', 'ar': 'توقع تقلبات Word Embeddings', 'es': 'Predecir la variabilidad de la incrustación', 'pt': 'Prevendo a variabilidade de incorporação de palavras', 'fr': 'Prédiction de la variabilité des intégrations de mots', 'ja': '単語の埋め込みのバラツキを予測する', 'zh': '占词嵌变异性', 'hi': 'Word एम्बेडिंग परिवर्तनशीलता की भविष्यवाणी करना', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование вариабельности вложений слов', 'ga': 'Athraitheacht Leabaithe Focal a Thuar', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შებეჭდვის ცვლილება', 'el': 'Προβλεπόμενη μεταβλητότητα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων', 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazási változások előrejelzése', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру айнымалысы', 'it': 'Prevedere la variabilità delle incorporazioni di parole', 'lt': 'Sąvokų įterpimo kintamumo prognozavimas', 'mk': 'Предвидување на променливост на вклопување на зборови', 'ms': 'Memandangkan Variabiliti Penjelmaan Kata', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dഗണന നടത്തുന്ന മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Үг нэвтрүүлэх өөрчлөлт', 'mt': 'It-Tbassir tal-Varjabbiltà tal-Inkorporazzjonijiet tal-Kliem', 'no': 'Forhåndsvising av tekstinnbæringsvariabel', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie zmienności osadzeń słowa', 'ro': 'Prevederea variabilității încorporărilor de cuvinte', 'sr': 'Predviðavajuæa variabilnost ukljuèenja reèi', 'si': 'වචන සම්බන්ධන වෙනස්ථාවක්', 'ur': 'Word Embedding Variability', 'so': 'Horumarinta isbedelka hadalka', 'sv': 'Förutsäge variabilitet för Word-inbäddningar', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை முன்னிலைப்படுத்தும் மாறிகள்', 'vi': 'Định trước môi trường lời khai:', 'uz': 'Soò£zning oldinga oò£zgarishlar', 'bg': 'Променливост на вграждането на думи', 'hr': 'Predviđavajuća variabilnost uključenja riječi', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af variabilitet for indlejringer af ord', 'nl': 'Variabiliteit voor het insluiten van woorden voorspellen', 'de': 'Variable Worteinbettungen vorhersagen', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی تغییر وارد کردن کلمات', 'sw': 'Ubadiliko', 'id': 'Memprediksi Variabilitas Pencampuran Kata', 'tr': 'Sözler Edilmeleri Öň bellenen', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i variabilitetit të përfshirjes së fjalëve', 'af': 'Voorskou Woord Inbetering Veranderlike', 'ko': '단어 삽입의 변이성을 예측하다', 'bn': 'পছন্দ করা শব্দের বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Predviđavajuća variabilnost uključenja riječi', 'cs': 'Předpověď proměnnosti vložení slov', 'et': 'Sõna põimimise muutuvuse prognoosimine', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներգրավման փոփոխությունների կանխատեսումը', 'az': '썓窶썬殼쐠쎰斧楲䐠駉楹鿅歩쥬犙੩', 'fi': 'Wordin upotusten muuttuvuuden ennustaminen', 'ca': "Predir la variabilitat d'incorporació de paraules", 'jv': 'Miscellaneous', 'he': 'ניתן לנחש שינוי התקפות מילים', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje spremenljivosti vdelav besed', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་བསུབ་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Neural word embeddings models (such as those built with word2vec) are known to have stability problems : when retraining a model with the exact same hyperparameters, words neighborhoods may change. We propose a method to estimate such variation, based on the overlap of neighbors of a given word in two models trained with identical hyperparameters. We show that this inherent variation is not negligible, and that it does not affect every word in the same way. We examine the influence of several features that are intrinsic to a word, corpus or embedding model and provide a methodology that can predict the variability (and as such, reliability) of a word representation in a semantic vector space.', 'ar': 'من المعروف أن نماذج تضمين الكلمات العصبية (مثل تلك التي تم إنشاؤها باستخدام word2vec) تعاني من مشاكل في الاستقرار: عند إعادة تدريب نموذج باستخدام نفس المعلمات الفائقة بالضبط ، قد تتغير الكلمات المجاورة. نقترح طريقة لتقدير هذا الاختلاف ، بناءً على تداخل الجيران لكلمة معينة في نموذجين مدربين بمعلمات تشعبية متطابقة. نظهر أن هذا الاختلاف المتأصل لا يمكن إهماله ، وأنه لا يؤثر على كل كلمة بنفس الطريقة. ندرس تأثير العديد من الميزات التي تعتبر جوهرية لكلمة أو مجموعة أو نموذج تضمين ونقدم منهجية يمكنها التنبؤ بالتنوع (وعلى هذا النحو ، الموثوقية) لتمثيل الكلمة في فضاء متجه دلالي.', 'es': 'Se sabe que los modelos de incrustación de palabras neuronales (como los creados con word2vec) tienen problemas de estabilidad: cuando se vuelve a entrenar un modelo con exactamente los mismos hiperparámetros, las palabras vecindades pueden cambiar. Proponemos un método para estimar dicha variación, basado en la superposición de vecinos de una palabra dada en dos modelos entrenados con hiperparámetros idénticos. Demostramos que esta variación inherente no es despreciable y que no afecta a todas las palabras de la misma manera. Examinamos la influencia de varias características que son intrínsecas a una palabra, corpus o modelo de incrustación y proporcionamos una metodología que puede predecir la variabilidad (y, como tal, la confiabilidad) de la representación de una palabra en un espacio vectorial semántico.', 'fr': "Les modèles d'intégration de mots neuronaux (tels que ceux créés avec word2vec) sont connus pour présenter des problèmes de stabilité\xa0: lors du réapprentissage d'un modèle avec exactement les mêmes hyperparamètres, les voisinages de mots peuvent changer. Nous proposons une méthode pour estimer cette variation, basée sur le chevauchement des voisins d'un mot donné dans deux modèles entraînés avec des hyperparamètres identiques. Nous montrons que cette variation inhérente n'est pas négligeable et qu'elle n'affecte pas tous les mots de la même manière. Nous examinons l'influence de plusieurs caractéristiques intrinsèques à un mot, à un corpus ou à un modèle d'intégration et proposons une méthodologie qui peut prédire la variabilité (et donc la fiabilité) d'une représentation de mot dans un espace vectoriel sémantique.", 'pt': 'Modelos de incorporação de palavras neurais (como aqueles construídos com word2vec) são conhecidos por terem problemas de estabilidade: ao retreinar um modelo com exatamente os mesmos hiperparâmetros, as vizinhanças das palavras podem mudar. Propomos um método para estimar tal variação, baseado na sobreposição de vizinhos de uma dada palavra em dois modelos treinados com hiperparâmetros idênticos. Mostramos que essa variação inerente não é desprezível e que não afeta todas as palavras da mesma maneira. Examinamos a influência de vários recursos que são intrínsecos a uma palavra, corpus ou modelo de incorporação e fornecemos uma metodologia que pode prever a variabilidade (e, como tal, a confiabilidade) de uma representação de palavra em um espaço vetorial semântico.', 'ja': 'ニューラルワード埋め込みモデル（ word 2 vecで構築されたモデルなど）には、安定性の問題があることが知られています。まったく同じハイパーパラメータでモデルを再トレーニングすると、近隣の単語が変更される可能性があります。私たちは、同一のハイパーパラメータで訓練された２つのモデルにおける所与の単語の隣接する部分の重複に基づいて、そのような変動を推定する方法を提案する。この固有のバリエーションは無視できないものであり、すべての単語に同じように影響を与えるわけではないことを示しています。我々は、単語、コーパス、または埋め込みモデルに固有のいくつかの特徴の影響を検討し、意味ベクトル空間における単語表現の変動性（およびそのような信頼性）を予測することができる方法論を提供する。', 'zh': '已知神经词嵌(如用word2vec者)有稳定性:当用全同者参数更练模形,单词邻域或有变。 吾建一度之法,盖用同超参数练二模给定单词邻项之重也。 吾知变化不可忽,且不以一道加单词。 臣等考单词,语料库嵌模形固有数特征,并给一法,可以占语义向量空中单词示可变性(可靠性)。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल (जैसे कि वर्ड 2 वीईसी के साथ निर्मित) को स्थिरता की समस्याओं के लिए जाना जाता है: जब सटीक समान हाइपरपैरामीटर के साथ एक मॉडल को फिर से प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, तो शब्द पड़ोस बदल सकते हैं। हम समान हाइपरपैरामीटर के साथ प्रशिक्षित दो मॉडलों में किसी दिए गए शब्द के पड़ोसियों के ओवरलैप के आधार पर इस तरह की भिन्नता का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह अंतर्निहित भिन्नता नगण्य नहीं है, और यह हर शब्द को उसी तरह से प्रभावित नहीं करता है। हम कई विशेषताओं के प्रभाव की जांच करते हैं जो एक शब्द, कॉर्पस या एम्बेडिंग मॉडल के लिए आंतरिक हैं और एक ऐसी पद्धति प्रदान करते हैं जो एक शब्दार्थ वेक्टर स्पेस में एक शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व की परिवर्तनशीलता (और जैसे, विश्वसनीयता) की भविष्यवाणी कर सकती है।', 'ru': 'Известно, что нейронные модели вложений слов (например, построенные с помощью word2vec) имеют проблемы со стабильностью: при переобучении модели с точно такими же гиперпараметрами слова соседи могут меняться. Предложен метод оценки такой вариации, основанный на перекрытии соседей данного слова в двух моделях, обученных с идентичными гиперпараметрами. Мы показываем, что эта внутренняя вариация не пренебрежимо мала, и что она не влияет на каждое слово одинаково. Мы изучаем влияние нескольких признаков, присущих модели слова, корпуса или вложения, и предоставляем методологию, которая может предсказать изменчивость (и, как таковая, надежность) представления слова в семантическом векторном пространстве.', 'ga': "Is eol go mbíonn fadhbanna cobhsaíochta ag samhlacha neadaithe focal (amhail iad siúd a tógadh le word2vec): agus samhail á hathoiliúint leis na hipearpharaiméadair chéanna go beacht, féadfaidh comharsanachtaí focail a athrú. Molaimid modh chun éagsúlacht den sórt sin a mheas, bunaithe ar fhorluí na gcomharsana d’fhocal tugtha in dhá mhúnla atá oilte le hipearpharaiméadair chomhionanna. Léirímid nach beag an éagsúlacht dhúchasach seo, agus nach ndéanann sé difear do gach focal ar an mbealach céanna. Scrúdaímid tionchar roinnt gnéithe atá intreach d'fhocal, corpas nó samhail leabaithe agus cuirimid modheolaíocht ar fáil a fhéadfaidh éagsúlacht (agus mar sin, iontaofacht) ionadaíochta focal a thuar i spás veicteoireach shéimeantach.", 'ka': 'ნეიროლური სიტყვების მოდელები (როგორც სიტყვებით შექმნილი სიტყვებით) უცნობიან, რომ სტაბლიტური პრობლემები არიან: როდესაც მოდელს იგივე ჰიპეროპარამეტრებით გადასვლა, სიტ ჩვენ გვეყველა მეტი, რომელიც ასეთი განსაცემებების განსაზღვრება, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული სიტყვის სამუშაოდ, ორი მოდელში იდენტიკური ჰიპეროპარამეტრებით განაზღვრე ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს შესახებ განცვლილება არ უნდა იყოს, და რომ ეს არ შეიძლება ყველა სიტყვას ერთად. ჩვენ შევხედავთ რამდენიმე ფუნქციების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც სიტყვის, კორპუსს ან დავყენებული მოდელის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც შეიძლება გადაინტერესება სიტყვის გამოსახულება (და როგორც ასეთი, დარწმუნებელ', 'it': "I modelli di incorporazione di parole neurali (come quelli costruiti con word2vec) sono noti per avere problemi di stabilità: quando si riqualifica un modello con gli stessi iperparametri, le parole quartieri possono cambiare. Proponiamo un metodo per stimare tale variazione, basato sulla sovrapposizione di vicini di una data parola in due modelli addestrati con iperparametri identici. Dimostriamo che questa variazione intrinseca non è trascurabile, e che non influenza ogni parola nello stesso modo. Esaminiamo l'influenza di diverse caratteristiche intrinseche a un modello di parola, corpus o embedding e forniamo una metodologia in grado di prevedere la variabilità (e come tale, l'affidabilità) di una rappresentazione di una parola in uno spazio vettoriale semantico.", 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης νευρωνικών λέξεων (όπως αυτά που κατασκευάζονται με το είναι γνωστό ότι έχουν προβλήματα σταθερότητας: κατά την επανεκπαίδευση ενός μοντέλου με τις ίδιες ακριβώς υπερπαραμέτρους, οι γειτονιές λέξεων μπορεί να αλλάξουν. Προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο εκτίμησης τέτοιων παραλλαγών, με βάση την επικάλυψη γειτόνων μιας δεδομένης λέξης σε δύο μοντέλα εκπαιδευμένα με πανομοιότυπες υπερπαραμέτρους. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η εγγενής διακύμανση δεν είναι αμελητέα και ότι δεν επηρεάζει κάθε λέξη με τον ίδιο τρόπο. Εξετάζουμε την επίδραση πολλών χαρακτηριστικών που είναι εγγενείς σε μια λέξη, σώμα ή μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης και παρέχουμε μια μεθοδολογία που μπορεί να προβλέψει τη μεταβλητότητα (και ως τέτοια την αξιοπιστία) μιας αναπαράστασης λέξεων σε έναν σημασιολογικό διανυσματικό χώρο.', 'hu': 'A neurális szóbeágyazási modellek (például a word2vec segítségével készültek) stabilitási problémákkal küzdenek: amikor egy modell átképzése pontosan ugyanazokkal a hiperparaméterekkel, a szavak megváltozhatnak. Javasoljuk az ilyen változások becslésére szolgáló módszert, amely egy adott szó szomszédainak átfedésén alapul, két azonos hiperparaméterekkel kiképzett modellben. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez a benne rejlő változás nem elhanyagolható, és hogy nem befolyásolja minden szót ugyanúgy. Megvizsgáljuk számos olyan jellemző hatását, amelyek egy szó, corpus vagy beágyazási modellhez lényegesek, és olyan módszertant biztosítunk, amely előre tudja jósolni egy szóreprezentáció variabilitását (és mint ilyen, megbízhatóságát) egy szemantikai vektortérben.', 'lt': 'Žinoma, kad neurologinių žodžių įterpimo modeliai (pvz., sukurti su word2vec) turi stabilumo problemų: persikvalifikuojant model į su tiksliais tais pačiais hiperparatoriais žodžiai gali pasikeisti. Siūlome tokį skirtumą įvertinti remiantis tam tikro žodžio kaimynų dubliavimu dviejuose modeliuose, parengtuose su identiškais hiperparatoriais. Mes rodome, kad šis būdingas skirtumas nėra nereikšmingas ir kad jis neturi vienodo poveikio kiekvienam žodžiui. Mes išnagrinėjame kelių požymių, kurie yra būdingi žodžiui, korpusui ar įterpimo modeliui, įtaką ir pateikiame metodiką, kuri gali prognozuoti žodžio atspindėjimo semantiniame vektoriuje kintamumą (ir kaip tokia, patikimumą).', 'mk': 'Се знае дека моделите за внесување на нервни зборови (како оние изградени со word2vec) имаат проблеми со стабилноста: кога се претренира модел со точни исти хиперпараметри, зборовите населби може да се променат. Предложуваме метод за проценка на ваква варијација, базиран на преплавувањето на соседите на еден даден збор во два модели обучени со идентични хиперпараметри. Ние покажуваме дека оваа природна варијација не е заборавена, и дека не влијае на секој збор на истиот начин. Го испитуваме влијанието на неколку карактеристики кои се внатрешни во збор, корпус или модел на вградување и обезбедуваме методологија која може да ја предвиде варијабилноста (и како таква, доверливоста) на претставувањето на зборот во семантичен векторен простор.', 'ml': 'സ്ഥിരമായ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് പോലെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്കുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d (വോര്\u200dഡ്2വിക്ക് കൊണ്ട് നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു)  ഇത്തരം മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കണക്കാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അയല്\u200dക്കാരുടെ വാക്കിന്റെ മൂല്യം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഈ നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d അശ്രദ്ധയില്ലെന്നും അത് ഒരേ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നില്ലെന്നും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ക ഒരു വാക്ക്, കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അകത്തുള്ള മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയെ പ്രവചിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന', 'kk': 'Невралдық сөздерді ендіру үлгілері (мәлімет 2vec құрылған үлгілер) дұрыстық мәселелері бар деп белгіледі: өзгертілген гиперпараметрлермен үлгілерді қайта алу кезінде, айырмалы сөздер өзгерте Біз осылай айырмашылығын бағалау әдісін таңдаймыз, бір-бір гиперпараметрлермен оқылған екі үлгілерде келтірілген сөздердің айырмашылығына негізделген. Біз бұл түрлендіріміз келмейді деп көрсетедік. Бұл әрбір сөздерге бірдей әсер етпейді. Біз сөз, корпус немесе ендіру үлгісіне ендірілген бірнеше мүмкіндіктердің әсерін тексеріп, семантикалық вектор орындағы сөздердің айнымалылығын таңдай алатын методологияны таңдап береміз.', 'ms': 'Neural word embeddings models (such as those built with word2vec) are known to have stability problems: when retraining a model with the exact same hyperparameters, words neighborhoods may change.  Kami cadangkan kaedah untuk menghargai variasi seperti ini, berdasarkan salinan tetangga bagi perkataan yang diberi dalam dua model dilatih dengan hyperparameter yang sama. Dan demi sesungguhnya! Kami perlihatkan bahawa perbezaan yang ada di sisi Allah itu bukanlah sia-sia, dan bahawa perbezaan itu tidak menimpa tiap-tiap perkataan dengan cara yang sama. Kami memeriksa pengaruh beberapa ciri-ciri yang intrinsik kepada perkataan, korpus atau model embedding dan menyediakan metodologi yang boleh meramalkan variabiliti (dan sebagaimana itu, kepercayaan) bagi perwakilan perkataan dalam ruang vektor semantik.', 'mn': 'Дуурал үгийг жишээ ижил гиперпараметртэй загвар авах үед хөршүүн үгийг өөрчлөх боломжтой. Бид ийм өөрчлөлттэй тооцоолох арга зааж өгсөн хоёр үгийн хөрш нарын тооцоолж, адилхан гиперпараметр боловсруулагдсан хоёр загвар дээр суралцах арга зааж байна. Бид энэхүү өөрчлөлтийг тодорхойлж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь бүх үгийг адилхан нөлөөлж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид нэг үг, корпус эсвэл хамтын загвар дээр дотоод байгаа олон өөрчлөлтийн нөлөөг шалгаж, семантик вектор орон зайд хэлбэрийг тодорхойлж чадна.', 'no': 'Nøyrale ord innebyggingsmodeller (slik som dei bygde med ord2vek) er kjent til å ha stabilitetsoppel: når du gjer eit modell med dei nøyaktige same hyperparametra, kan ord nabolar endra. Vi foreslår ein metode for å vurdere slike variasjonar, basert på overlappen av nabolar av eit gitt ord i to modeller trengte med identiske hyperparametrar. Vi viser at denne innhaldne variasjonen er ikkje neglig, og at det ikkje påvirkar kvar ord på same måte. Vi undersøker effekten av fleire funksjonar som er intrinsisk til eit ord, korpus eller innebyggende modell og gir ein metodologi som kan foregå variabelen (og som slik, reliabilitet) av eit ordrepresentasjon i eit semantisk vektorrom.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem newrali (bħal dawk mibnija b’word2vec) huma magħrufa li għandhom problemi ta’ stabbiltà: meta jitħarreġ mill-ġdid mudell bl-istess iperparaturi eżatti, il-kliem il-viċinat jista’ jinbidel. Aħna nipproponu metodu għall-istima ta’ varjazzjoni bħal din, ibbażat fuq l-irduppjar ta’ ġirien ta’ kelma partikolari f’żewġ mudelli mħarrġa b’iperparaturi identiċi. Aħna nuru li din il-varjazzjoni inerenti mhijiex negliġibbli, u li ma taffettwax kull kelma bl-istess mod. We examine the influence of several features that are intrinsic to a word, corpus or embedding model and provide a methodology that can predict the variability (and as such, reliability) of a word representation in a semantic vector space.', 'pl': 'Modele osadzeń słów neuronowych (takie jak te zbudowane za pomocą Word2vec) mają problemy ze stabilnością: podczas przeszkolenia modelu o dokładnie tych samych hiperparametrach, słowa osiedla mogą ulec zmianie. Proponujemy metodę oszacowania takiej zmienności, opartą na nakładaniu się sąsiadów danego słowa w dwóch modelach trenowanych z identycznymi hiperparametrami. Pokazujemy, że ta nieodłączna zmiana nie jest nieznaczna i że nie wpływa na każde słowo w ten sam sposób. Badamy wpływ kilku cech, które są nieodłączne dla słowa, korpusu lub modelu osadzenia i dostarczamy metodologię, która może przewidzieć zmienność (i jako taka wiarygodność) reprezentacji słowa w semantycznej przestrzeni wektorowej.', 'sr': 'Neuralne reèi ukljuèuju modele (kao što su izgraðene sa reèima 2vek) poznate su da imaju probleme sa stabilnošæu: kada se vrati model sa taènim istim hiperparametrom, reèi susjedstva mogu promijeniti. Predlažemo metodu za procjenu takve varijacije, na osnovu preklapanja susjeda određene reči u dva modela obučenih sa identičnim hiperparametrom. Pokazujemo da ova inherentna varijacija nije zanemarena i da ne utječe na svaku reč na isti način. Pregledavamo uticaj nekoliko karakteristika koji su unutrašnji na reč, korpus ili ugrađeni model i pružamo metodologiju koja može predvidjeti variabilnost (i kao takva, pouzdanost) reči predstavljanja u semantičkom vektorskom prostoru.', 'si': 'ස්ථාවත්වය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නිර්මාණ වචන සම්බන්ධ විධානය (වගේම word2Vec වලින් නිර්මාණය කරපු විධානය) දැනගන්නේ: මොඩේලය අපි ඒ වගේ වෙනස් විදියට අනුමානය කරන්න විදියට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් සැලසුම් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය දෙකක් විදියට අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ වෙනස් විදිහට අවශ්\u200dය නොවෙයි කියලා, ඒ වගේම ඒකෙන් හැම වචනයක්ම අවශ්\u200dය නොවෙයි. අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා වචනයක්, කෝර්පුස් නැත්තම් සංවිධානයක්, වචනයක්, සංවිධානයක් සඳහා වෙනස් වෙක්ටර් අවසානයක් (වගේම, විශ්වාසිතාව', 'so': 'Kalimaha naadiga ah waxaa loo yaqaan inay haystaan dhibaatooyin istareexsan, marka aad sameynayso tusaale isku mid ah ee heerarka, hadalka deriska ayaa beddeli kara. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qaab aan qiimeynayno kala duwanaanshaha, iyadoo ku saleysan qofka deriska ah hadal la qoray labada tusaale oo lagu baray isku mid ah hyperparameters. Waxaynu muujinnaa in beddelkanu uusan ka halmaansaneyn, waxna uma saameyn hadal kasta si isku mid ah. Waxaan baaraynaa saameyn ku saabsan waxyaabo badan oo ku jirta hadal, korpus ama midowga, waxaana sameynaynaa qaab ku saabsan bedelka (iyo tusaale ahaan, aaminsnaanta) ee hadal ka mid ah goobta jidhka.', 'ta': 'நெருக்கமான வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் மாதிரிகள் (வார்த்தை 2வெக்கு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள்) நிலையான பிரச்சனைகள் இருக்கும் என்று அறியப்படுகிறது: ஒர இத்தகைய மாறுபாட்டை மதிப்பிட வேண்டும் முறையை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், இரண்டு மாதிரிகளில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு வார்த்தையை  நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இந்த மாறுபாடு பராமுகமாக இல்லை, அது ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் ஒரே வழியில் பாதிக்காது. ஒரு வார்த்தை, கார்புஸ் அல்லது உள்ளமைப்பு மாதிரியின் தாக்கத்தை நாம் சோதிக்க வேண்டும். ஒரு வார்த்தையின் மாற்றத்தை முன்விரும்ப முடியும் முறையை ஒரு முறை', 'ro': 'Modelele de încorporare a cuvintelor neurale (cum ar fi cele construite cu word2vec) sunt cunoscute pentru a avea probleme de stabilitate: atunci când recalificați un model cu exact același hiperparametru, cuvintele cartiere se pot schimba. Propunem o metodă de estimare a unei astfel de variații, bazată pe suprapunerea vecinilor unui anumit cuvânt în două modele antrenate cu hiperparametri identici. Noi arătăm că această variație inerentă nu este neglijabilă și că nu afectează fiecare cuvânt în același mod. Examinăm influența mai multor caracteristici intrinsece unui cuvânt, corpus sau model de încorporare și oferim o metodologie care poate prezice variabilitatea (și, ca atare, fiabilitatea) reprezentării unui cuvânt într-un spațiu vectorial semantic.', 'sv': 'Neurala ordinbäddningsmodeller (t.ex. de byggda med word2vec) är kända för att ha stabilitetsproblem: när man omskolar en modell med exakt samma hyperparameter kan ord kvarter ändras. Vi föreslår en metod för att uppskatta en sådan variation, baserad på överlappning av grannar av ett givet ord i två modeller utbildade med identiska hyperparametrar. Vi visar att denna inneboende variation inte är försumbar, och att den inte påverkar varje ord på samma sätt. Vi undersöker påverkan av flera funktioner som är inneboende i en ord-, korpus- eller inbäddningsmodell och tillhandahåller en metod som kan förutsäga variabiliteten (och som sådan tillförlitligheten) av en ordrepresentation i ett semantiskt vektorutrymme.', 'ur': 'نئورل کلمات مہینڈنگ موڈل (جیسے کلمات 2ویک کے ساتھ بنائے ہوئے) کو ثابت قدم مشکلات کا معلوم ہوتا ہے: جب ایک موڈل کو دقیقاً دقیقاً دقیقاً ہیپر پارامتر کے ساتھ پھیر لیتے ہیں، کلمات مہینڈ بدل سکتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ اس طرح کی تغییر کا مطالبہ کریں، ایک لفظ کے پیچھے لفظ پر جو دو نمڈلوں میں تعلیم کی جاتی ہے ایک جیسے ہایرپارامیٹر کے ساتھ تعلیم کی جاتی ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ تغییر غفلت نہیں ہے اور یہ ہر کلمہ کے برابر تغییر نہیں کرتا ہم ایک کلم، کورپوس یا انڈینگ موڈل کے اندر مختلف فرق کے تاثیر کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور ایک طریقہ پیش آ سکتے ہیں جو ایک کلم کی نشانیاں (اور اس طرح، اعتمادی) ایک سیمنٹی ویکتور فضا میں ایک لکھ سکتی ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Biz buni o'zgarishni tasavvur qilish usuli, ikkita modelda bir xil hyperparametrlar bilan o'rganilgan so'zning qo'llangan soʻzning asosida asoslangan. We show that this inherent variation is not negligible, and that it does not affect every word in the same way.  Biz bir necha shakllar so'z, corpus yoki embedded modelning qismini tekshirimiz va o'zgarishni oldin oladigan usulni o'rganish mumkin, va semantik vektor фазsidagi so'zning (va ishonaligi) oʻzgarishni tasdiqlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Mẫu lắp ghép từ thần kinh (như những từ được chế tạo với Từ 2vec) có khả năng có vấn đề về độ ổn định: Khi tái tạo một mô hình với các cường độ tương tự, từ ngữ có thể thay đổi. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp ước lượng độ biến đổi này dựa trên sự gấp đôi của hàng xóm của một từ chỉ trong hai mẫu được huấn luyện với các siêu tham số giống nhau. Chúng tôi cho thấy sự khác biệt này không đáng kể, và nó không ảnh hưởng mọi từ theo cùng một cách. Chúng tôi kiểm tra tác động của nhiều tính năng cơ bản của một từ, cơ thể hay mô hình ghép nội dung và cung cấp một phương pháp dự đoán sự thay đổi (và như thế, đáng tin) của mô tả từ trong một khối ký tự ngữ.', 'bg': 'Моделите за вграждане на невронни думи (като тези, изградени с word2vec) имат проблеми със стабилността: при преквалификация на модел с точно същите хиперпараметри думите квартали могат да се променят. Предлагаме метод за оценка на такава вариация, базиран на припокриването на съседите на дадена дума в два модела, обучени с идентични хиперпараметри. Показваме, че тази присъща вариация не е за пренебрегване и че не засяга всяка дума по един и същ начин. Изследваме влиянието на няколко особености, които са присъщи на дадена дума, корпус или вграден модел и предоставяме методология, която може да предскаже променливостта (и като такава, надеждността) на дадено слово представяне в семантично векторно пространство.', 'da': 'Neurale ordindlejringer modeller (såsom dem, der er bygget med word2vec) er kendt for at have stabilitetsproblemer: Når man omskoler en model med nøjagtig de samme hyperparametre, kan ord kvarterer ændre sig. Vi foreslår en metode til at estimere en sådan variation, baseret på overlapning af naboer af et givet ord i to modeller trænet med identiske hyperparametre. Vi viser, at denne iboende variation ikke er ubetydelig, og at den ikke påvirker hvert ord på samme måde. Vi undersøger indflydelsen af flere funktioner, der er iboende i et ord, korpus eller indlejring model, og giver en metode, der kan forudsige variabiliteten (og som sådan pålideligheden) af et ord repræsentation i et semantisk vektorrum.', 'nl': 'Neurale woordinbeddingsmodellen (zoals die gebouwd met word2vec) zijn bekend om stabiliteitsproblemen: bij het herscholen van een model met exact dezelfde hyperparameters kunnen woordwijken veranderen. We stellen een methode voor om dergelijke variatie te schatten, gebaseerd op de overlap van buren van een gegeven woord in twee modellen getraind met identieke hyperparameters. We laten zien dat deze inherente variatie niet te verwaarlozen is, en dat het niet elk woord op dezelfde manier beïnvloedt. We onderzoeken de invloed van verschillende kenmerken die intrinsiek zijn aan een woord, corpus of embedding model en bieden een methodologie die de variabiliteit (en dus betrouwbaarheid) van een woordrepresentatie in een semantische vectorruimte kan voorspellen.', 'id': 'Model embedding kata saraf (seperti yang dibangun dengan word2vec) diketahui memiliki masalah stabilitas: ketika melatih ulang model dengan hyperparameter yang sama persis, kata-kata lingkungan dapat berubah. Kami mengusulkan metode untuk memperkirakan variasi seperti ini, berdasarkan salinan tetangga dari kata tertentu dalam dua model dilatih dengan hyperparameter yang sama. (Dan Kami tunjukkan kepada mereka) Kami tunjukkan kepada mereka (bahwa perbedaan-perbedaan yang ada di dalamnya) yakni perbedaan-perbedaan yang ada di dalamnya (bukanlah sia-sia) artinya tidak sia-sia (dan bahwa perbedaan itu tidak berpengaruh kepada tiap-tiap perkataan Kami memeriksa pengaruh beberapa fitur yang intrinsik pada sebuah kata, corpus atau model embedding dan menyediakan metodologi yang dapat memprediksi variabilitas (dan sebagai seperti itu, kepercayaan) dari perwakilan kata dalam ruang vektor semantis.', 'de': 'Neuronale Worteinbettungsmodelle (wie die, die mit word2vec erstellt wurden) haben bekanntlich Stabilitätsprobleme: Beim Umschulen eines Modells mit genau den gleichen Hyperparametern können sich Wortumfelder ändern. Wir schlagen eine Methode vor, um solche Variationen zu schätzen, basierend auf der Überlappung von Nachbarn eines gegebenen Wortes in zwei Modellen, die mit identischen Hyperparametern trainiert wurden. Wir zeigen, dass diese inhärente Variation nicht vernachlässigbar ist und nicht jedes Wort in gleicher Weise beeinflusst. Wir untersuchen den Einfluss mehrerer Merkmale, die einem Wort-, Korpus- oder Einbettungsmodell inhärent sind und stellen eine Methodik zur Verfügung, die die Variabilität (und damit die Zuverlässigkeit) einer Wortdarstellung in einem semantischen Vektorraum vorhersagen kann.', 'ko': '모두가 알다시피 신경 단어 삽입 모델(예를 들어word2vec로 구축된 모델)에는 안정성 문제가 존재한다. 완전히 같은 초파라미터를 사용하여 모델을 재훈련할 때 단어의 이웃에 변화가 발생할 수 있다.우리는 이러한 변화를 예측하는 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 같은 초파라미터로 훈련된 두 모델에서 단어의 이웃을 정하는 중첩을 바탕으로 한다.우리는 이러한 내재적인 변화가 모든 단어에 똑같은 방식으로 영향을 주지 않는다는 것을 증명했다.우리는 단어, 어료 라이브러리 또는 삽입 모델 고유의 몇 가지 특징의 영향을 연구했고 의미 벡터 공간에서 단어가 표시하는 가변성(그리고 신뢰성)을 예측할 수 있는 방법을 제공했다.', 'tr': 'Niral söz integrasy modelleri Böyle değişiklikleri tahmin etmek için bir yöntem teklif ediyoruz. Birlikte bir hiperparametre ile eğitilen iki modellerde bulunan komşuların üstüne dayanan bir kelime sayısına dayanan. Biz esasy üýtgeşikleri täsirli däldir we ol her sözüň bir ýaly täsirleşmeýändigini görkeýäris. Bir kelime, korpus ya da içeri giren modellerin etkisini inceledik ve semantik vektör uzayda bir kelime ifadesini tahmin edebilen bir metodoloji sağlayacağız.', 'sw': 'neno la msingi linajumuisha mifano (kama vile zile zilizojengwa kwa Word2vec) linafahamika kuwa na matatizo ya utulivu: pale akirudisha muundo na kipimo sawa sawa na kipaji hicho, maneno yanaweza kubadili. Tunazipendekeza njia ya kutathmini tofauti kama hizo, kwa kuzingatia upana wa majirani wa neno fulani katika mifano miwili iliyojifundishwa na kipimo sawa. Tunaonyesha kwamba mabadiliko haya yanayoendelea si ya ghafilika, na kwamba haiathiri kila neno kwa namna moja. Tunatachunguza athari ya baadhi ya vipengele vinavyohusiana na maneno, makampuni au mifano ya ndani na kutoa mbinu ambazo zinaweza kutabiri mabadiliko (na kama vile, uaminifu) ya neno linalowakilishwa katika nafasi ya sekunde ya vector.', 'fa': 'کلمه\u200cهای عصبی که مدل\u200cها (مانند آن\u200cها که با کلمه\u200cهای ۲ویک ساخته شده\u200cاند) مشکلات استواری دارند شناخته می\u200cشوند: وقتی مدل را با همان پارامتر دقیقاً بازیافت می\u200cکنند، کلمه\u200cهای محله\u200cها می\u200cتوانند تغییر دهند. ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا این تغییرات را ارزیابی کنیم، بر اساس تغییرات همسایه\u200cهای یک کلمه به دو مدل آموزش داده شده با هیپر پارامتر یکسان. ما نشان می دهیم که این تغییر اصلی غفلت نیست، و این تغییر اصلی به هر کلمه به همان شکل تأثیر نمی دهد. ما تاثیر چندین ویژگی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که در یک کلمه، کورپوس یا مدل داخلی هستند و روش\u200cشناسی را تغییر می\u200cدهیم که می\u200cتواند تغییر قابلیت (و به عنوان این، اعتماد قابلیت) یک کلمه در فضای ویکتوری semantic را پیش بینی کند.', 'am': 'የነዌብ ቃላት በኩል መግለጫ (በWord2vec ውስጥ የተገነቡት) የደህንነት መከራ እንዲኖሩ ይጠራል፤ በሙሉ አካባቢ በተመሳሰል ጊዜ ቃላት ጎረቤቶች ሊለውጥ ይችላል፡፡ እንደዚህ ዓይነት ልውጤትን ለመቆጣጠር እናስባለን፤ በሁለት ዓይነት በተመሳሳይ የhyperparameter በሚያስተማሩበት በአጎረቤዎች ላይ በተሰጠው ቃላት መሸፈኛ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህም የሚኖር ልውጤት የዘገየ እንደሆነ እናሳየዋለን፤ ይህም ቃል ሁሉ በአንድ ዓይነት እንደማይደርስበት ነው፡፡ የቃላት፣ የኮርፓስ ወይም የግንኙነት ሞዴል የሚያስፈልገውን በብዙ ምርጫዎች ላይ እናፈትናለን እና በsemantic vector ቦታ የቃልን መልዕክት (እና ምሳሌ የታመነ) የሚለውጥን ማቀበል የሚችሉትን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Neurale woord inbêring modele (soos die gebou met woord2vec) word bekend om stabiliteit probleme te hê: wanneer 'n model met die egte selfde hiperparameters terte terugtel, woorde naboeste kan verander. Ons voorstel 'n metode om sodanige veranderinge te vurdering, gebaseer op die oorvloei van naboeste van 'n gegewe woord in twee modele opgelei met identiese hiperparameters. Ons wys dat hierdie inherende verandering nie onverwerklik is nie, en dat dit nie elke woord op dieselfde manier invloek nie. Ons ondersoek die influens van verskeie eienskappe wat binneste is aan 'n woord, korpus of inbetering model en verskaf 'n metodologie wat die veranderbaarheid (en soos so, vertroubaarheid) van 'n woord verteenwoording in 'n semantiese vektorruimte kan voorskou.", 'hr': 'Neuralne riječi uključuju modele (kao što su izgrađeni s riječima 2vec) poznati su da imaju probleme s stabilitetom: kada se uzvrati model sa istim hiperparametrom, riječi susjedstva mogu promijeniti. Predlažemo metodu procjene takve varijacije na temelju preklapanja susjeda određene riječi u dva modela obučenih s identičnim hiperparametrom. Pokazujemo da ova inherentna varijacija nije zanemarena i da ne utječe na svaku riječ na isti način. Provjeravamo utjecaj nekoliko karakteristika koji su unutrašnji na riječ, korpus ili ugrađeni model i pružamo metodu koja može predvidjeti variabilnost (i kao takva, pouzdanost) riječi predstavljanja u semantičkom vektorskom prostoru.', 'sq': 'Modelet e përfshirjes së fjalëve nervore (të tilla si a to të ndërtuara me word2vec) janë të njohura për të patur probleme stabiliteti: kur rindërton një model me të njëjtat hiperparametra saktësisht, fjalët lagje mund të ndryshojnë. Ne propozojmë një metodë për të vlerësuar një variacion të tillë, bazuar në mbishtypjen e fqinjëve të një fjale të caktuar në dy modele të stërvitur me hiperparametra identike. Ne tregojmë se kjo ndryshim nuk është i pakujdesshëm dhe nuk prek çdo fjalë në të njëjtën mënyrë. Ne shqyrtojmë ndikimin e disa karakteristikave që janë të brendshme në një fjalë, korpus apo model të përfshirjes dhe ofrojmë një metodologi që mund të parashikojë variabilitetin (dhe si të tillë, besueshmërinë) e një përfaqësimi të fjalës në një hapësirë vektori semantik.', 'az': 'Nöral söz içərisində modellər (sözləri 2vec ilə inşa edilənlər kimi) sabitqətli problemləri vardır: həqiqətən, aynı hiperparametru ilə modelləri alınca, məmləkətlər dəyişə bilər. Biz bu dəyişiklikləri təmin etmək üçün bir metodu təklif edirik, bu sözün qonşularının üstünlüyünə görə, eyni hiperparametrlərlə təhsil edilmiş iki modellərdə. Biz göstəririk ki, bu müxtəlif dəyişiklik gizli olmaz və hər sözün eyni yolda etkisi olmaz. Biz bir söz, korpus və ya in şa modeli ilə içərisində olan bir neçə fərqli təsirlərin təsirini incidirik və semantik vektör kosmosunda bir söz göstəricisini təmin edə bilən bir metodoloji təmin edirik.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային բառերի ներգրավման մոդելները (ինչպիսիք են օրինակ, որոնք կառուցված են Word2vex-ով) հաստատության խնդիրներ ունեն: Երբ մոդելը վերադասավորվում է ճիշտ նույն հիպերպարամետերով, բառերը կարող են փոխվել: We propose a method to estimate such variation, based on the overlap of neighbors of a given word in two models trained with identical hyperparameters.  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս բնորոշ տարբերությունը նշանակալի չէ, և որ այն նույն կերպ չի ազդում յուրաքանչյուր բառին: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բառի, կորպոսի կամ ներդրող մոդելի որոշ հատկությունների ազդեցությունը և ապահովում ենք մեթոդոլոգիա, որը կարող է կանխատեսել բառի ներկայացման տարբերակությունը (և որպես այդպիսի, վստահությունը) սեմանտիկ վեկտորի տարածքում:', 'bn': 'Neural word embeddings models (such as those built with word2vec) are known to have stability problems: when retraining a model with the exact same hyperparameters, words neighborhoods may change.  আমরা এই ধরনের পরিবর্তন হিসেবে প্রস্তাব করি, যা দুই মডেলে প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়েছে তার প্রতিবেশীদের একটি শব্দের উপর ভিত্তিতে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন কোন উপেক্ষা নেই এবং এটা একই ভাবে প্রভাব ফেলে না। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রভাব পরীক্ষা করি যা একটি শব্দ, কোর্পাস অথবা মডেলের প্রতি ব্যবহৃত এবং একটি পদ্ধতি প্রদান করি যা সেমেন্টিক ভেক্টরের স্থানে একটি শব্দ প্রতিনি', 'ca': "Es coneix que els models d'incorporació de paraules neuronals (com aquells construïts amb word2vec) tenen problemes d'estabilitat: quan es reestrueix un model amb exactament els mateixos hiperparàmetres, les paraules barris poden canviar. Proposem un mètode per estimar aquesta variació, basat en la sobreposió de veïns d'una paraula dada en dos models entrenats amb hiperpàmetres idèntics. Mostrem que aquesta variació inherent no és negligüent i que no afecta cada paraula de la mateixa manera. Examinem l'influència de diverses característiques intrínsecs d'una paraula, corpus o model d'incorporació i proporcionem una metodologia que pot predir la variabilitat (i com a tal, fiabilitat) d'una representació de paraules en un espai vector semàntic.", 'fi': 'Neuraalisilla sanaupotusmalleilla (kuten word2vec:llä rakennetuilla) tiedetään olevan vakausongelmia: kun uudelleenkoulutetaan mallia, jossa on täsmälleen samat hyperparametrit, sanat naapurustot voivat muuttua. Ehdotamme menetelmää tällaisen vaihtelun arvioimiseksi, joka perustuu tietyn sanan naapureiden päällekkäisyyteen kahdessa samanlaisilla hyperparametreilla harjoitetussa mallissa. Osoitamme, että tämä luontainen vaihtelu ei ole vähäpätöinen ja että se ei vaikuta jokaiseen sanaan samalla tavalla. Tutkimme useiden sanan, korpusen tai upotusmallin luontaisten ominaisuuksien vaikutusta ja tarjoamme menetelmän, jolla voidaan ennustaa sanaesityksen vaihtelua (ja siten luotettavuutta) semanttisessa vektoriavaruudessa.', 'bs': 'Neuralne riječi uključuju modele (kao što su izgrađeni s rečenicama 2vec) poznati su da imaju probleme sa stabilitetom: kada se povrati model sa istim hiperparametrom, riječi susjedstva mogu promijeniti. Predlažemo metodu procjene takve varijacije, na temelju preklapanja susjeda određene riječi u dva modela obučenih s identičnim hiperparametrom. Pokazujemo da ova nasljedna varijacija nije zanemarena i da ne utječe na svaku riječ na isti način. Provjeravamo utjecaj nekoliko karakteristika koji su unutrašnji na riječ, korpus ili ugrađeni model i pružamo metodologiju koja može predvidjeti variabilnost (i kao takva, pouzdanost) riječi predstavljanja u semantičkom vektorskom prostoru.', 'et': 'Neuraalsete sõnade manustamise mudelitel (näiteks need, mis on ehitatud Word2vec) on teadaolevalt stabiilsusprobleeme: täpselt samade hüperparameetritega mudeli ümberõppel võivad sõnad naabruskonnad muutuda. Pakume välja meetodi sellise variatsiooni hindamiseks, mis põhineb antud sõna naabrite kattumisel kahes mudelis, mis on treenitud identsete hüperparameetritega. Me näitame, et see olemuslik variatsioon ei ole tähtsusetu ja et see ei mõjuta iga sõna samamoodi. Uurime sõnale, korpusele või manustamismudelile omaste mitmete omaduste mõju ning pakume metoodikat, mis suudab ennustada sõnalise esituse varieeruvust (ja sellisena usaldusväärsust) semantilises vektoriruumis.', 'cs': 'Modely vkládání neuronálních slov (jako například ty postavené pomocí Word2vec) mají problémy se stabilitou: při přeškolení modelu se stejnými hyperparametry se mohou změnit slova sousedství. Navrhujeme metodu odhadu této variace, založenou na překrytí sousedů daného slova ve dvou modelech trénovaných se identickými hyperparametry. Ukazujeme, že tato inherentní variace není zanedbatelná a že neovlivňuje každé slovo stejným způsobem. Zkoumáme vliv několika rysů, které jsou vnitřní pro slovo, korpus nebo vkládací model a poskytujeme metodiku, která dokáže předpovídat variabilitu (a jako takovou spolehlivost) reprezentace slova v sémantickém vektorovém prostoru.', 'jv': "Neral word embedding modes (like that used with word2vec) are knowable to have stabty bugs: when retain a model with the exact same limeparameters, words neighbourhoodscan change. NAME OF TRANSLATORS We proposal a method to assess like this variant, bazed on the super Lap of the neighbours of a given word in 2 modes Trigged with an same parameters. It's like this Awak dhéwé ngerti, karo hal-hal mbara iki ora bakal nggagal, lan ora bakal terus saben kelas kuwi cah saben kelas. Awak dhéwé éntukne perusahaan karo akeh operasi sing nyenggap karo awak dhéwé, karo model sing berarti ngono nggawe sistem sing bisa nyenggap perusahaan (karo koyo, nglangayakno) awak dhéwé", 'ha': "An sani misãlai da aka shigar da maganar neural (kamar waɗanda aka gina da word2vc) sunã da matabbata masu istanci: idan ya sake wani motel da misãlin da ke daidaita, sunan maganar sunan kusa su musanya. Kana buɗa wani hanyoyi wa ka ƙaddara wa wannan variani, a kan kwamfyutan ma'abũcin maƙiyan da aka yi wa magana a cikin misãlai biyu wanda aka sanar da shi da misãlan Hyperparameteri. Muna nũna cẽwa wannan gafala ba ta zama gafala ba, kuma bã ta zartar da kõwa magana daidai. Kana jarraba muhallin wasu misãlai waɗand a ke cikin cikin magana, ko kuma masu cikin shirin ayuka, kuma Munã sanya wani hanyoyi wanda zai iya gabatar da musamman (da misãli, mai aminci) a cikin filin kashi na semantic.", 'sk': 'Modeli živčnih besed (npr. modeli, zgrajeni z word2vec) imajo težave s stabilnostjo: pri preusposabljanju modela s popolnoma enakimi hiperparametri se besede soseske lahko spremenijo. Predlagamo metodo za oceno takšne variacije, ki temelji na prekrivanju sosedov dane besede v dveh modelih, usposobljenih z enakimi hiperparametri. Pokazujemo, da ta neločljiva variacija ni zanemarljiva in da ne vpliva na vsako besedo na enak način. Preučimo vpliv več značilnosti, ki so značilne za besedo, korpus ali model vgradnje, in zagotovimo metodologijo, ki lahko napove variabilnost (in kot taka zanesljivost) besedne reprezentacije v semantičnem vektorskem prostoru.', 'he': 'מודלים של מילים עצביות (כמו אלה שנבנו עם word2vec) ידועים שיש להם בעיות יציבות: כשמחדש ניסוי מודל עם בדיוק אותם היפרפרמטרים, מילים שכונות יכולות להשתנות. אנו מציעים שיטה להעריך שינוי כזה, בהתבסס על התקפות של שכנים של מילה מסוימת בשני דוגמנים מאומנים עם היפרפרמטרים זהים. אנו מראים שהשוווארציה הנכונה הזו אינה זנחה, ושהיא לא משפיעה על כל מילה באותה דרך. אנו בודקים את השפעה של מספר תכונות שבתוכניות למילה, קופוס או מודל מכילה ומספקים מטודולוגיה שיכולה לחזות את ההתנתנות (וכזו, אמינות) של מילה מייצגת בחלל ווקטור סמנטי.', 'bo': 'Neural word embeddings models (such as those built with word2vec) are known to have stability problems: when retraining a model with the exact same hyperparameters, words neighborhoods may change. We propose a method to estimate such variation, based on the overlap of neighbors of a given word in two models trained with identical hyperparameters. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་འགྱུར་བ་འདི་ནི་ཁྱད་པར་མི་ཆོས་རེད། བྱས་ན་འདིས་གཞན་གཅིག་པ་ལ་ཐུབ་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་པར་མ ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་དབང་ཆ་འདྲ་ཞིག་གནད་དོན་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དབང་ཆ་གཅིག་དང་མཐུད་སྒྲིག་མིང་དང་མཐུད་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་'}
{'en': 'Integrating Multiplicative Features into Supervised Distributional Methods for Lexical Entailment', 'ar': 'تكامل السمات المضاعفة في طرق التوزيع الخاضعة للإشراف من أجل الاستدلال المعجمي', 'es': 'Integración de características multiplicativas en métodos de distribución supervisada para la implicación léxica', 'pt': 'Integrando recursos multiplicativos em métodos de distribuição supervisionados para vinculação léxica', 'fr': "Intégrer des caractéristiques multiplicatives dans des méthodes distributionnelles supervisées pour l'implication lexicale", 'zh': '集乘法特徵于词法蕴涵监督分布之法', 'hi': 'लेक्सिकल Entailment के लिए पर्यवेक्षित वितरण विधियों में गुणात्मक सुविधाओं को एकीकृत करना', 'ja': '多重特徴を統括的な流通方法に統合すること', 'ru': 'Интеграция мультипликативных признаков в контролируемые методы распределения для лексического влечения', 'ga': 'Gnéithe Iolracha a Chomhtháthú i Modhanna Dáilte Maoirsithe le haghaidh Foghraíochta Foclóra', 'ka': 'მრავალტიკატიური ფუნქციების ინტერგურაცია Lexical Entailment', 'kk': 'Көптеген мүмкіндіктерді лексикалық біріктіру үшін басқару үшін тарату әдістеріне біріктіру', 'it': "Integrazione di funzionalità moltiplicative nei metodi di distribuzione supervisionati per l'entificazione lessicale", 'hu': 'A multiplikatív funkciók integrálása a felügyelt elosztási módszerekbe a lexikális kiterjesztéshez', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση πολλαπλασιαστικών χαρακτηριστικών σε εποπτευόμενες μεθόδους διανομής για Lexical Entail', 'lt': 'Įtraukti daugiamečius požymius į stebimus paskirstymo metodus, skirtus leksiniam sutrikimui', 'mk': 'Интегрирање на мултипликативните функции во надгледуваните дистрибуционални методи за лексикална болест', 'mt': 'L-integrazzjoni ta’ Karatteristiċi Multiplikattivi fil-Metodi ta’ Distribuzzjoni Superviżi għal Mard Lessiku', 'mn': 'Хүржүүлэх боломжуудыг Lexical Entailment-ын удирдлагатай хуваарилалтын арга замаар нэгтгэх', 'ms': 'Comment', 'no': 'Integrerer fleire funksjonar i oversikte distribusjonsmetodar for leksisk innstillingar', 'pl': 'Integracja funkcji multiplikacyjnych z nadzorowanymi metodami dystrybucyjnymi dla dopracowania leksykalnego', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d എന്\u200dറെയില്\u200dമെന്\u200dറിനുള്ള വിതരണ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ വിഭവങ്ങളിലേക്ക് ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ട', 'ro': 'Integrarea caracteristicilor multiplicative în metodele de distribuție supravegheate pentru Entailment Lexical', 'so': 'Isku qabsashada qalabka dhibaatada ee Leksikal', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Integrera multiplikativa funktioner i övervakade distributionsmetoder för Lexical Entailment', 'ta': 'பெருக்கல் பண்புகளை லெக்சிக்கல் நுழைவுக்கான முறைகளில் சேர்க்கும்', 'sr': 'Integrujući mnogobrojne karakteristike u nadzorne distribucijske metode za leksičku kompletnost', 'ur': 'لکسکسیل انٹیلیم کے لئے زیادہ تعداد کے فرصت کو نظارت کیا گیا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tiêu chuẩn đa ứng dụng vào các phương pháp phân phối giám sát quy luật.', 'nl': 'Integratie van multiplicatieve kenmerken in begeleide distributiemethoden voor Lexical Entailment', 'bg': 'Интегриране на мултипликативни функции в контролираните дистрибуционни методи за лексикално вписване', 'hr': 'Integrujući mnogobrojne karakteristike u nadzorne distribucijske metode leksičke komplekcije', 'da': 'Integrering af multiplikative funktioner i overvågede distributionsmetoder til Lexical Entailment', 'de': 'Integration multiplikativer Funktionen in überwachte Verteilungsmethoden für Lexikal Entailment', 'id': 'Integrating Multiplicative Features into Supervised Distribution Methods for Lexical Entailment', 'ko': '곱셈 특징을 어휘에 내포된 감독 분포 방법에 통합시키다', 'fa': 'جمع کردن ویژگی\u200cهای چندگانه به روش\u200cهای پراکنده\u200cای تحت نظر گرفته برای استفاده\u200cهای سکسیکی', 'af': 'Integrasie Multiplicative Features in Supervised Distributional Methods for Lexical Entailment', 'sq': 'Integrimi i Karakteristikave Multiplikative në Metodat e Shpërndarjes të mbikqyrura për Marrjen Lexike', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha Tamko za Pili katika njia za Usambazaji wa Ujumbe wa Lexico', 'tr': 'Lexical Entailment üçin örän Çarpdyrlyk Features into Supervised Distributional Methods for Lexical Entailment', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկական հիվանդության վերահսկվող բազմապատկած հատկությունները ինտեգրելը', 'az': 'Çiftləşdirilmiş Özellikləri Lexical Entailment üçün Supervised Distribution Methods for Integration Multiplicative Features into Supervised Distribution Methods', 'ca': 'Integrar les Característiques Multiplicatives en Métodes de Distribució Supervisós de Malalties Lècsiques', 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্সিয়াল ইমেন্টেমেন্টের জন্য সাপার্ভিয়েশন বিতরণের মাধ্যমে বহুগুণিক বৈশিষ্ট্য যুক্ত করা হবে', 'cs': 'Integrace multiplikačních funkcí do kontrolovaných distribučních metod pro Lexické vylepšení', 'et': 'Mitmekordsete funktsioonide integreerimine järelevalve all olevatesse levitamismeetoditesse', 'fi': 'Moninkertaisten ominaisuuksien integrointi valvottuihin jakelumenetelmiin Lexical Entailment', 'bs': 'Integrujući mnogobrojne karakteristike u nadzorne distribucijske metode za leksičku kompletnost', 'jv': '>', 'sk': 'Vključevanje multiplikacijskih funkcij v nadzorovane distribucijske metode za leksično vključevanje', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'שילוב תכונות רבות לתוך שיטות פיצוי משגיחים למחלה לקסית', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་ལུས་མཐུན་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཆེ་བ་དག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ།'}
{'en': 'Supervised distributional methods are applied successfully in lexical entailment, but recent work questioned whether these methods actually learn a relation between two words. Specifically, Levy et al. (2015) claimed that linear classifiers learn only separate properties of each word. We suggest a cheap and easy way to boost the performance of these methods by integrating multiplicative features into commonly used representations. We provide an extensive evaluation with different classifiers and evaluation setups, and suggest a suitable evaluation setup for the task, eliminating biases existing in previous ones.', 'ar': 'يتم تطبيق طرق التوزيع الخاضعة للإشراف بنجاح في الاستدلال المعجمي ، لكن العمل الأخير تساءل عما إذا كانت هذه الأساليب تتعلم بالفعل علاقة بين كلمتين. على وجه التحديد ، ليفي وآخرون. (2015) ادعى أن المصنفات الخطية تتعلم فقط خصائص منفصلة لكل كلمة. نقترح طريقة رخيصة وسهلة لتعزيز أداء هذه الأساليب من خلال دمج الميزات المضاعفة في التمثيلات شائعة الاستخدام. نحن نقدم تقييمًا شاملاً بمصنفات مختلفة وإعدادات تقييم ، ونقترح إعداد تقييم مناسب للمهمة ، مما يلغي التحيزات الموجودة في التحيزات السابقة.', 'es': 'Los métodos de distribución supervisada se aplican con éxito en la implicación léxica, pero un trabajo reciente cuestionó si estos métodos realmente aprenden una relación entre dos palabras. Específicamente, Levy et al. (2015) afirmaron que los clasificadores lineales solo aprenden propiedades separadas de cada palabra. Sugerimos una forma barata y fácil de aumentar el rendimiento de estos métodos mediante la integración de características multiplicativas en las representaciones de uso común. Proporcionamos una evaluación exhaustiva con diferentes clasificadores y configuraciones de evaluación, y sugerimos una configuración de evaluación adecuada para la tarea, eliminando los sesgos existentes en las anteriores.', 'pt': 'Métodos de distribuição supervisionada são aplicados com sucesso na vinculação lexical, mas trabalhos recentes questionaram se esses métodos realmente aprendem uma relação entre duas palavras. Especificamente, Levy et al. (2015) afirmou que classificadores lineares aprendem apenas propriedades separadas de cada palavra. Sugerimos uma maneira barata e fácil de aumentar o desempenho desses métodos integrando recursos multiplicativos em representações comumente usadas. Fornecemos uma avaliação extensa com diferentes classificadores e configurações de avaliação, e sugerimos uma configuração de avaliação adequada para a tarefa, eliminando vieses existentes nas anteriores.', 'fr': "Les méthodes distributionnelles supervisées sont appliquées avec succès dans l'implication lexicale, mais des travaux récents ont demandé si ces méthodes apprennent réellement une relation entre deux mots. Plus précisément, Levy et al. (2015) ont affirmé que les classificateurs linéaires n'apprennent que des propriétés distinctes de chaque mot. Nous proposons un moyen simple et peu coûteux d'améliorer les performances de ces méthodes en intégrant des caractéristiques multiplicatives dans des représentations couramment utilisées. Nous fournissons une évaluation complète avec différents classificateurs et configurations d'évaluation, et suggérons une configuration d'évaluation adaptée à la tâche, en éliminant les biais existants dans les précédents.", 'ja': '監視された分配法は、語彙的帰結にうまく適用されているが、最近の研究では、これらの方法が実際に2つの単語間の関係を学習するかどうかが疑問視されている。具体的には、Levy et al. (2015)は、線形分類子は各単語の個別の性質のみを学習すると主張した。私たちは、一般的に使用される表現に乗算機能を統合することによって、これらの方法のパフォーマンスを向上させる安価で簡単な方法を提案します。さまざまな分類子と評価設定を使用して広範な評価を行い、以前のものに存在するバイアスを排除して、タスクに適した評価設定を提案します。', 'zh': '监分布法成于词汇蕴涵,而近事质疑,果得两词之间否。 具体来说,Levy等(2015)言线性类器但学单词独性。 建廉价简之法,因将乘法特徵集成到常用以崇其能。 臣等以异类之器,与估设之广估,并为任议之宜,以消前差。', 'ru': 'Контролируемые методы распределения успешно применяются в лексической трактовке, но недавние работы поставили под сомнение, действительно ли эти методы изучают связь между двумя словами. В частности, Леви и др. (2015) утверждали, что линейные классификаторы изучают только отдельные свойства каждого слова. Мы предлагаем дешевый и простой способ повысить производительность этих методов путем интеграции мультипликативных признаков в широко используемые представления. Мы предоставляем обширную оценку с различными классификаторами и настройками оценки и предлагаем подходящую настройку оценки для задачи, устраняя ошибки, существующие в предыдущих.', 'hi': 'पर्यवेक्षित वितरण विधियों को लेक्सिकल अनिवार्यता में सफलतापूर्वक लागू किया जाता है, लेकिन हाल के काम ने सवाल किया कि क्या ये विधियां वास्तव में दो शब्दों के बीच संबंध सीखती हैं। विशेष रूप से, लेवी एट अल (2015) ने दावा किया कि रैखिक क्लासिफायर प्रत्येक शब्द के केवल अलग-अलग गुणों को सीखते हैं। हम आमतौर पर उपयोग किए जाने वाले अभ्यावेदनों में गुणात्मक सुविधाओं को एकीकृत करके इन तरीकों के प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देने के लिए एक सस्ता और आसान तरीका सुझाते हैं। हम विभिन्न क्लासिफायरऔर मूल्यांकन सेटअप के साथ एक व्यापक मूल्यांकन प्रदान करते हैं, और कार्य के लिए एक उपयुक्त मूल्यांकन सेटअप का सुझाव देते हैं, जो पिछले लोगों में मौजूद पूर्वाग्रहों को समाप्त करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuirtear modhanna dáileacháin maoirsithe i bhfeidhm go rathúil i bhfoclóireacht, ach ceistíodh in obair a rinneadh le déanaí an bhfoghlaimíonn na modhanna seo gaol idir dhá fhocal i ndáiríre. Go sonrach, tá Levy et al. (2015) nach bhfoghlaimíonn aicmitheoirí líneacha ach airíonna ar leith gach focal. Molaimid bealach saor agus éasca chun feidhmíocht na modhanna seo a threisiú trí ghnéithe iolracha a chomhtháthú i léiriúcháin a úsáidtear go coitianta. Cuirimid meastóireacht fhairsing ar fáil le haicmitheoirí agus socruithe meastóireachta éagsúla, agus molaimid socrú measúnaithe oiriúnach don tasc, ag fáil réidh le laofachtaí a bhí ann roimhe seo.', 'hu': 'A felügyelt elosztási módszereket sikeresen alkalmazzák a lexikai vonatkozásban, de a legutóbbi munkák megkérdőjelezték, hogy ezek a módszerek valójában két szó közötti kapcsolatot tanulnak-e. Konkrétan Levy és társai (2015) azt állították, hogy a lineáris osztályozók minden szó külön tulajdonságait tanulják. Javasoljuk, hogy olcsó és egyszerű módon növeljük ezeknek a módszereknek a teljesítményét azáltal, hogy a multiplikatív funkciókat integráljuk a gyakran használt reprezentációkba. Átfogó értékelést biztosítunk különböző osztályozókkal és értékelési beállításokkal, és javasoljuk a feladathoz szükséges megfelelő értékelési beállításokat, kiküszöbölve a korábbi előítéleteket.', 'ka': 'მაგრამ ახალი სამუშაო მუშაობის შესახებ, რომ ეს მეტი მართლაც ორი სიტყვების შორის შესახებ ვისწავლა. განსაკუთრებულად, Levy et al. (2015) იტყვია, რომ ლეინერი კლასიფიკაციები სწავლის მხოლოდ ყოველ სიტყვის განსაკუთრებული მნიშვნელობა. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ მარტივი და მარტივი გზა, რომელიც ამ მეტირების გამოსახულებას უფრო მარტივი გამოყენებულებაში ინტერგურაციას გამოყენებული გამოსახულებული გამო ჩვენ განსხვავებული კლასიფიკაციების და განსაზღვრების კონფიგურაციების განსაზღვრებით გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებით და დაგვეყვებით საჭირო განსაზღვრებით დავაკეთებთ დავაკეთებთ დავაკ', 'it': 'I metodi distributivi supervisionati sono applicati con successo nel coinvolgimento lessicale, ma recenti lavori hanno messo in dubbio se questi metodi imparano effettivamente una relazione tra due parole. Nello specifico, Levy et al. (2015) hanno affermato che i classificatori lineari imparano solo proprietà separate di ogni parola. Suggeriamo un modo economico e semplice per aumentare le prestazioni di questi metodi integrando caratteristiche moltiplicative nelle rappresentazioni comunemente utilizzate. Forniamo una valutazione approfondita con diversi classificatori e configurazioni di valutazione, e suggeriamo un setup di valutazione adatto per il compito, eliminando i pregiudizi esistenti in quelli precedenti.', 'el': 'Οι εποπτευόμενες μέθοδοι κατανομής εφαρμόζονται με επιτυχία στη λεξική συμπερίληψη, αλλά πρόσφατες εργασίες αμφισβητούν αν αυτές οι μέθοδοι μαθαίνουν πραγματικά μια σχέση μεταξύ δύο λέξεων. Συγκεκριμένα, ο Λέβι κ.α. (2015) ισχυρίστηκε ότι οι γραμμικοί ταξινομητές μαθαίνουν μόνο ξεχωριστές ιδιότητες κάθε λέξης. Προτείνουμε έναν φτηνό και εύκολο τρόπο για να αυξήσετε την απόδοση αυτών των μεθόδων ενσωματώνοντας πολλαπλά χαρακτηριστικά σε κοινές αναπαραστάσεις. Παρέχουμε μια εκτενή αξιολόγηση με διαφορετικούς ταξινομητές και ρυθμίσεις αξιολόγησης, και προτείνουμε μια κατάλληλη ρύθμιση αξιολόγησης για την εργασία, εξαλείφοντας τις προκατάληψη που υπήρχαν σε προηγούμενες.', 'kk': 'Бақылау үшін дистрибуттардың әдістері лексикалық жағдайда сәтті қолданылады, бірақ соңғы жұмыс әдістері екі сөз арасындағы қатынастығын үйренуді сұрады. Сәйкес, Levy et al. (2015) сызық классификациялары тек әрбір сөздің бөлек қасиеттерін үйренеді. Біз бұл әдістерді көптеген мүмкіндіктерді көпшілікті қасиеттерді көпшілік қолданылатын таңбаларға артық және оңай арқылы көмектесетін. Біз басқа классификациялар мен оқиғалар баптауларына кеңейтіп, тапсырманың жақсы оқиғаларын баптау және алдыңғыларда барлық оқиғаларды өшіруге болады.', 'lt': 'Kontroliuojami paskirstymo metodai sėkmingai taikomi tekstiniame įtraukime, tačiau neseniai atliktas darbas suabejojo, ar šie metodai iš tikrųjų išmoko ryšį tarp dviejų žodžių. Konkrečiai, Levy et al. (2015) teigė, kad linijiniai klasifikatoriai mokosi tik atskirų kiekvieno žodžio savybių. Siūlome pigų ir lengvų būdą padidinti šių metodų veiksmingumą, integruojant dauginamąsias savybes į paprastai naudojamas reprezentacijas. Pateikiame išsamų vertinimą su skirtingais klasifikatoriais ir vertinimo struktūromis ir siūlome tinkamai įvertinti užduotį, panaikindami ankstesniuose.', 'mk': 'Супервизираните дистрибуционални методи се успешно применуваат во лексикалната интелигенција, но неодамнешната работа се сомнева дали овие методи всушност научија однос помеѓу два збора. Специфично, Levy et al. (2015) тврдеа дека линијарните класификатори учат само одделни сопствености на секој збор. Предлагаме евтин и лесен начин да се зајакне резултатот на овие методи со интеграција на множителните карактеристики во обично употребени претставувања. Ние обезбедуваме екстремна проценка со различни класификатори и поставувања на проценка, и предлагаме соодветно поставување на проценка за задачата, елиминирајќи ги предрасудите што постојат во претходните.', 'ms': 'Kaedah distribusi yang diawasi dilaksanakan dengan sukses dalam penyelesaian leksikal, tetapi kerja baru-baru ini bertanya-tanya sama ada kaedah ini benar-benar belajar hubungan antara dua perkataan. Secara khusus, Levy et al. (2015) menyatakan bahawa pengklasifikasi linear hanya belajar ciri-ciri terpisah setiap perkataan. Kami cadangkan cara murah dan mudah untuk meningkatkan prestasi kaedah ini dengan mengintegrasikan ciri-ciri pendaraban ke dalam persembahan yang biasa digunakan. Kami menyediakan penilaian yang luas dengan pengklasifikasi dan seting penilaian yang berbeza, dan menyarankan seting penilaian yang sesuai untuk tugas, menghapuskan biases yang wujud dalam tugas terdahulu.', 'mt': "Metodi ta’ distribuzzjoni sorveljati jiġu applikati b’suċċess f’involviment lexiku, iżda xogħol reċenti kellu dubju dwar jekk dawn il-metodi tabilħaqq jitgħallmux relazzjoni bejn żewġ kliem. B’mod speċifiku, Levy et al. (2015) iddikjaraw li l-klassifikaturi lineari jitgħallmu biss proprjetajiet separati ta’ kull kelma. Aħna ssuġġerixxu mod irħas u faċli biex tingħata spinta lill-prestazzjoni ta' dawn il-metodi billi jiġu integrati karatteristiċi multiplikattivi f'rappreżentazzjonijiet użati b'mod komuni. Aħna nipprovdu evalwazzjoni estensiva b’klassifikaturi differenti u strutturi ta’ evalwazzjoni, u nissuġġerixxu struttura xierqa ta’ evalwazzjoni għall-kompitu, li telimina l-preġudizzji eżistenti f’dawk preċedenti.", 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн хуваарилалтын аргыг эцэст нь эцэст нь эцэст нь хэрэглэгддэг. Гэхдээ саяхан ажлын ажил эдгээр аргыг хоёр үгийн хоорондын харилцаа суралцах эсэхийг асуусан. Тухайлбал, Levy et al. (2015) шулууны хэлбэрүүд үг бүрийн ялгаатай байдлыг суралцаж байдаг. Бид эдгээр аргаар үржүүлэх чадварыг ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг илтгэлүүдэд нэгтгэхэд хямд болон амархан арга замыг нэмэгдүүлэхийг сануулдаг. Бид өөр төрлийн классификатор болон үнэлгээ багтаах хөтөлбөртэй өргөн дүгнэлт гаргаж, ажлын тулд зөв дүгнэлт багтана, өмнөх үед байгаа өргөндлөлүүдийг устгах санал болгож байна.', 'ml': 'വിതരണ രീതികള്\u200d വിജയകരമായി പ്രയോഗിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. പക്ഷെ അടുത്ത ജോലി ചോദിക്കുന്നു. ഈ രീതികള്\u200d രണ്ടു വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ബന്ധ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ലെവി et al. (2015) വാക്കുകള്\u200d വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച് വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമേ പഠിക സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികളിലേക്ക് ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ രീതികളുടെ പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തിന് വളര്\u200dത നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗവിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിവിധ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിലയിക്കുന്ന സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിശേഷിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ജോലിക്കു', 'ro': 'Metodele distribuționale supravegheate sunt aplicate cu succes în implicarea lexicală, dar lucrările recente au pus întrebări dacă aceste metode învață de fapt o relație între două cuvinte. Mai exact, Levy et al. (2015) au susținut că clasificatorii liniari învață doar proprietățile separate ale fiecărui cuvânt. Vă sugerăm o modalitate ieftină și ușoară de a spori performanța acestor metode prin integrarea caracteristicilor multiplicative în reprezentări utilizate în mod obișnuit. Oferim o evaluare extinsă cu diferite clasificatori și setări de evaluare și sugerăm o setare de evaluare adecvată pentru sarcină, eliminând prejudecățile existente în cele anterioare.', 'pl': 'Nadzorowane metody dystrybucji są z powodzeniem stosowane w implikacji leksykalnej, ale ostatnie prace kwestionowały, czy metody te rzeczywiście uczą się relacji między dwoma słowami. W szczególności Levy et al. (2015) twierdził, że klasyfikatory liniowe uczą się tylko oddzielnych właściwości każdego słowa. Proponujemy tani i łatwy sposób na zwiększenie wydajności tych metod poprzez integrację cech mnożeniowych w powszechnie stosowanych reprezentacjach. Zapewniamy obszerną ocenę z różnymi klasyfikatorami i konfiguracjami oceny oraz proponujemy odpowiednią konfigurację oceny dla zadania, eliminując uprzedzenia istniejące w poprzednich.', 'no': 'Overvakte distribusjonsmetoder vert bruka fullførleg i leksisk innstilling, men nyleg arbeidet spurte om desse metodane faktisk lærer ein relasjon mellom to ord. Levy et al. (2015) tvrdi at lineære klassifikatorar lærer berre eigenskapar for kvar ord. Vi foreslår ein billig og enkel måte å styra utviklinga av desse metodane ved å integrera multiplikativ funksjonar i vanleg brukte representasjonar. Vi gjev eit utvida evaluering med ulike klassifikatorar og evalueringsoppsett, og foreslår eit passende evalueringsoppsett for oppgåva, og eliminerer følgjande tilstandar.', 'sr': 'Nadzorne distribucijske metode se uspješno primjenjuju u leksičkoj namjeri, ali nedavno radno pitanje je li te metode zapravo nauče vezu između dve reči. Posebno, Levy et al. (2015) tvrdi da linearni klasifikatori nauče samo odvojene vlasništvo svake reči. Predlažemo jeftin i lak naèin da povećamo funkciju ovih metoda integrisanjem multiplikativnih karakteristika u uobièajene predstave. Mi pružamo ogromnu procjenu različitim klasifikatorima i nastavama procjene i predlažemo odgovarajuću procjenu za zadatak, eliminisanje predrasude koje postoje u prethodnim.', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණය කරපු විදුලි විදුලි විධානය සමහරවිට ලෙක්සිකල් සිද්ධියෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒත් අලුත් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ විශේෂයෙන්ම, ලේවී එට් අල්. (2015) කිව්වා ලේනියාර් විශේෂකයෝ හැම වචනයේ පෙනෙක් විශේෂතාවක් විත අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩි කරන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිත විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න. අපි වෙනස් විශේෂකයෝ සහ විශේෂකයෝ සැකසුම් සමග විශේෂ විශේෂකයක් ප්\u200dරදානය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරදානයක් වෙනුවෙන් සඳහ', 'sv': 'Övervakade distributionsmetoder tillämpas framgångsrikt i lexikal involvering, men nyligen genomförda arbeten ifrågasatte huruvida dessa metoder faktiskt lär sig ett samband mellan två ord. Specifikt hävdade Levy et al. (2015) att linjära klassificerare endast lär sig separata egenskaper för varje ord. Vi föreslår ett billigt och enkelt sätt att öka prestandan för dessa metoder genom att integrera multiplikativa funktioner i vanliga representationer. Vi tillhandahåller en omfattande utvärdering med olika klassificerare och utvärderingsinställningar, och föreslår en lämplig utvärderingsinställning för uppgiften, vilket eliminerar fördomar som finns i tidigare.', 'ur': 'تحت نظر والی تقسیم کی طریقے لکسیکل کی خواہش میں موفق طور پر لازم کیے جاتے ہیں، لیکن اچھا کام پوچھا گیا ہے کہ یہ طریقے دو کلمات کے درمیان ایک رابطہ سیکھتے ہیں. ویسے طور پر، Levy et al. (۲۰۱۵) کہتا تھا کہ لینیاری کلاسپیر صرف ہر لفظ کی مختلف خصوصیت سیکھتے ہیں. ہم نے ان طریقوں کی فعالیت کو زیادہ آسان اور آسان طریقے سے پیش کیا ہے کہ ان طریقوں کی فعالیت کو زیادہ زیادہ کریں اور ان کی تعداد کی تعداد کے ذریعہ اکثریت کریں۔ ہم مختلف کلاسپیر اور ارزیابی سٹاپ کے ساتھ ایک بڑا ارزیابی پیش کرتے ہیں، اور اس کام کے لئے ایک مناسب ارزیابی سٹاپ پیش کرتے ہیں، پہلے لوگوں میں موجود ہونے والی منظورات کو ہٹا دیتے ہیں.', 'so': 'Qofka aqoonta lexicka ah waxaa lagu codsadaa hababka kala qaybsan, laakiin shaqada la soo dhowaaday waxay weydiinayaan in qaababkan ay ku bartaan xiriirka labada hadal. Si gaar ah, Levy et al. (2015) waxay sheegtay in fasaxyada qoriga ah ay bartaan gaar gaar ah oo kaliya hadal walba. Waxaannu talo bixinaynaa qaab sahlan oo fudud si loo kordhiyo qaababkan, si loo wada ururiyo qalab badan oo loo soo bandhigayo noocyada caadiga ah. Waxaannu qiimeyn dheeraad ah u siinaynaa dadka fasaxa kala duduwan iyo dhibaatooyin qiimeeya, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa in loo sameeyo qiimeyn ku habboon, in loo eliyo qaybaha ku jira ee hore.', 'ta': 'வெற்றிகரமாக செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட பங்கீட்டு முறைகள் வெற்றிகரமாக பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, ஆனால் சமீபத்தில் இந்த முறைகள் இரண்டு வார்த குறிப்பிட்டு, லெவி et al. (2015) ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் தனிப்பட்ட பண்புகளை மட்டும் கற்று கொள்ளும் என்று கூறினார். பெருக்கல் குணங்களை பொதுவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட குறிப்புகளாக ஒன்றாகச் சேர்க்க ஒரு சுலபமான மற்றும் எளிய வழி நாம் வேறு வகுப்பாளர்கள் மற்றும் மதிப்பீட்டு அமைப்புகளுடன் விரிவாக ஆராய்ச்சி வழங்குகிறோம், பணிக்கு ஒரு பொருத்தமான evaluation அமைப்பை பரிந', 'uz': "@ info Ko'rsatilgan Levy et al. (2015) davomida, liney turlari faqat har bir so'zning alohida teng xossalarini o'rganadi. Biz buning ko'plab xususiyatlarni oddiy va oddiy usulni ko'proq qo'shish uchun ko'plab qo'shish qoidamiz. Biz boshqa klassiplarni va qiymatlash muammolari bilan yetarlicha qiymatni bajaramiz va vazifa uchun yetarli qiymatni tasavvur qilamiz, avval mavjud tablarni olib tashlash imkoniyatini talab qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Các phương pháp phân phối được quản lý thành công trong tính khí ngôn ngữ, nhưng công việc gần đây đã đặt câu hỏi liệu các phương pháp này có học được mối liên hệ giữa hai từ không. Đặc biệt là Levy et al. (Tập đoàn Lời Lời) khai rằng các phân loại tuyến chỉ học các thuộc tính riêng của mỗi từ. Chúng tôi đề nghị một cách rẻ tiền và dễ dàng để nâng cao khả năng của các phương pháp này bằng cách trộn các tính năng nhân tạo vào các biểu tượng thường dùng. Chúng tôi cung cấp một đánh giá rộng với các phân loại khác nhau và cài đặt đánh giá, và đề xuất một cài đặt đánh giá thích hợp cho nhiệm vụ này, loại bỏ các giả lập tồn tại trong các loại trước.', 'da': 'Overvågede distributionsmetoder anvendes med succes i leksikalsk involvering, men nyere arbejde satte spørgsmålstegn ved, om disse metoder faktisk lærer en relation mellem to ord. Specielt hævdede Levy et al. (2015) at lineære klassificerere kun lærer separate egenskaber for hvert ord. Vi foreslår en billig og nem måde at øge ydeevnen af disse metoder ved at integrere multiplikative funktioner i almindeligt anvendte repræsentationer. Vi leverer en omfattende evaluering med forskellige klassificerere og evalueringsopsætninger, og foreslår en passende evalueringsopsætning til opgaven, hvilket eliminerer skævheder, der eksisterer i tidligere.', 'nl': 'Toezichthoudende distributiemethoden worden succesvol toegepast in lexicale implicatie, maar recent onderzoek vroeg zich af of deze methoden daadwerkelijk een relatie tussen twee woorden leren. Specifiek, Levy et al. (2015) beweerde dat lineaire classificatoren alleen afzonderlijke eigenschappen van elk woord leren. We stellen een goedkope en gemakkelijke manier voor om de prestaties van deze methoden te verbeteren door multiplicatieve kenmerken te integreren in veelgebruikte representaties. We bieden een uitgebreide evaluatie met verschillende classificatoren en evaluatieopstellingen, en stellen een geschikte evaluatieopstelling voor de taak voor, waarbij vooroordelen die in eerdere versies bestaan, worden geëlimineerd.', 'bg': 'Наблюдаваните дистрибуционни методи се прилагат успешно в лексикалното обвързване, но скорошна работа поставя под въпрос дали тези методи действително научават връзка между две думи. По-конкретно Леви и др. (2015) твърдят, че линейните класификатори научават само отделни свойства на всяка дума. Предлагаме евтин и лесен начин за повишаване на ефективността на тези методи чрез интегриране на мултипликативни функции в често използваните изображения. Предоставяме обширна оценка с различни класификатори и настройки за оценка и предлагаме подходяща настройка за оценка на задачата, елиминирайки предразсъдъците, съществуващи в предишните.', 'hr': 'Nadzorne distribucijske metode se uspješno primjenjuju u leksičkoj namjeri, ali nedavno radno pitanje je li te metode zapravo uče odnos između dvije riječi. Posebno, Levy et al. (2015) tvrdi da linearni klasifikatori nauče samo odvojene vlasništvo svake riječi. Predlažemo jeftin i lako način da se povećamo učinkovitost tih metoda uključujući multiplikativne funkcije u uobičajeno korištene predstave. Mi pružamo ogromnu procjenu s različitim klasifikatorima i nastavama procjene i predlažemo odgovarajuću procjenu za zadatak, eliminirajući predrasude postojeće u prethodnim.', 'id': 'Metode distribusi yang diawasi diterapkan dengan sukses dalam penyelesaian lexik, tapi pekerjaan baru-baru ini bertanya apakah metode ini benar-benar belajar hubungan antara dua kata. Khususnya, Levy et al. (2015) mengklaim bahwa klasifikasi linear hanya belajar properti terpisah setiap kata. Kami menyarankan cara murah dan mudah untuk meningkatkan prestasi dari metode ini dengan mengintegrasi fitur multiplikatif ke represisi yang biasa digunakan. Kami menyediakan evaluasi ekstensif dengan klasifikasi dan pengaturan evaluasi yang berbeda, dan menyarankan pengaturan evaluasi yang sesuai untuk tugas ini, menghapuskan biases yang ada di yang sebelumnya.', 'de': 'Überwachte Verteilungsmethoden werden erfolgreich im lexikalischen Engagement angewendet, aber neuere Arbeiten fragten, ob diese Methoden tatsächlich eine Beziehung zwischen zwei Wörtern erlernen. Insbesondere behaupteten Levy et al. (2015) dass lineare Klassifikatoren nur separate Eigenschaften jedes Wortes lernen. Wir schlagen eine kostengünstige und einfache Möglichkeit vor, die Leistung dieser Methoden zu steigern, indem multiplikative Merkmale in häufig verwendete Darstellungen integriert werden. Wir bieten eine umfangreiche Evaluation mit verschiedenen Klassifikatoren und Evaluationsaufbauten an und schlagen einen geeigneten Evaluationsaufbau für die Aufgabe vor, um bestehende Verzerrungen zu beseitigen.', 'ko': '감독 분배 방법은 어휘 함축에서 성공적으로 응용되었지만 최근의 연구에서는 이 방법들이 두 단어 간의 관계를 정말 배웠는지 의문이다.구체적으로 Levy 등(2015)은 선형 분류기가 단어마다 별도의 속성만 배운다고 주장했다.우리는 곱셈 특징을 자주 사용하는 표시에 집적하여 이러한 방법의 성능을 향상시키는 저렴하고 간단한 방법을 제시했다.우리는 서로 다른 분류기와 평가 설정을 사용하여 광범위한 평가를 제공했고 임무에 적합한 평가 설정을 제안하여 이전 평가에 존재했던 편견을 없앴다.', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای تقسیم تحت نظارت موفقیت در اراده\u200cی زبان استفاده می\u200cشود، ولی کار اخیرا پرسیده می\u200cشود آیا این روش\u200cها واقعاً ارتباطی بین دو کلمه یاد می\u200cگیرند. مخصوصاً Levy et al. (۲۰۱۵) ادعا کرد که کلانترین خط\u200cشناسی تنها ویژه\u200cهای جدا از هر کلمه یاد می\u200cگیرند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم راهی ارزون و آسان برای افزایش عملکرد این روش\u200cها با جمع کردن ویژگی\u200cهای چندین\u200cدهنده در نمایش\u200cهای معمولاً استفاده می\u200cشود. ما یک ارزیابی وسیع با گروه\u200cهای مختلف و تنظیمات ارزیابی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، و یک تنظیمات ارزیابی مناسب برای این کار را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، و حذف پیشنهاد در پیشینیان است.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa usambazaji unaotumiwa kwa mafanikio katika maarifa ya kijeshi, lakini kazi ya hivi karibuni inahoji ikiwa mbinu hizi zinajifunza uhusiano kati ya maneno mawili. Kwa hakika, Levy et al. (2015) alidai kuwa wataalamu wa rangi wanajifunza tu utaalam wa kila neno. Tunazipendekeza njia rahisi na rahisi ya kukuza utendaji wa njia hizi kwa kuunganisha vipengele vingi katika uwakilishi wa kawaida unaotumika. Tunatoa uchunguzi wa kina kwa wataalamu tofauti na matatizo ya uchunguzi, na tunapendekeza tathmini sahihi kwa ajili ya kazi hiyo, kuondoa upendeleo uliopo hapo awali.', 'af': "Ondergesien verspreidingsmetodes word suksesvol in leksiese aanhouding aangepas, maar onlangse werk vra om hierdie metodes eintlik 'n verwanting tussen twee woorde te leer. Spesifieke, Levy et al. (2015) het aanbeveel dat lineêre klassifiseerders slegs aparte eienskappe van elke woord leer. Ons voorstel 'n skaamte en maklik manier om die prestasie van hierdie metodes te vergroot deur multiplikatiewe funksies in gewoonlik gebruikte voorstellings te integreer. Ons verskaf 'n uitbreidige evaluering met verskillende klassifiseerders en evalueringsinstellings, en voorstel 'n geskikte evalueringsinstelling vir die taak, verwyder voorspoedings wat in vorige een bestaan.", 'am': 'Supervised distributional methods are applied successfully in lexical entailment, but recent work questioned whether these methods actually learn a relation between two words.  በተለያዩ፣ Levy et al. 2015) የደረጃ ክፍሎች ለሁሉም ቃላት የተለየ ምርጫዎችን ብቻ እንዲማሩ ነው፡፡ የነፃ እና ቀላል የእነዚህን ሥርዓት አካባቢ ምርጫዎችን ለመቀላቀል እናስባለን፡፡ በተለያዩ ግንኙነቶች እና ማስታወቂያ ግንኙነቶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለስራውም የተሻለ ማስታወቂያ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'tr': 'Yüksek faýllary bejerilen faýllary bejerilýär. Ýöne soňky işlemler bu yönleriň aslynda iki söz arasynda bir baglaýyşy öwrenip bilmeýändigini soradylar. Adatça, Levy et al. (2015) hat klasifikalaryň her sözüň aýratyn hasaplaryny öwrenip bilýändigini iddia etdi. Biz bu metodların etkinliğini çarpma özelliklerine sıradan kullanılan örneklere integral etmek için ucuz ve kolay bir şekilde teklif ediyoruz. Biz farklı klasörler we deňlenme düzümleri bilen üýtgedik we bu işiň üçin gowy deňlenme düzümlerini teklip edip, öňki sahypalarda durmuş durumlary ýitirýäris.', 'sq': 'Metodat shpërndarëse të mbikqyrura zbatohen me sukses në përfshirjen lexike, por puna e fundit pyeti nëse këto metoda mësojnë në të vërtetë një lidhje midis dy fjalëve. Specifikisht, Levy et al. (2015) pretenduan se klasifikuesit linear ë mësojnë vetëm prona të veçanta të çdo fjale. We suggest a cheap and easy way to boost the performance of these methods by integrating multiplicative features into commonly used representations.  Ne ofrojmë një vlerësim të gjerë me klasifikuesit e ndryshëm dhe konfigurimet e vlerësimit dhe sugjerojmë një konfigurim të përshtatshëm vlerësimi për detyrën, duke eleminuar paragjykimet ekzistuese në ato të mëparshme.', 'hy': 'Վերահսկված բաշխման մեթոդները հաջողությամբ կիրառվում են լեքսիկական ներգրավման մեթոդներում, բայց վերջին աշխատանքը հարցադրեց, արդյոք այս մեթոդները իրականում երկու բառի միջև հարաբերություն են սովորում: Մասնավորապես, Ղեվին և այլն (2015) պնդում էին, որ գծային դասակարգողները սովորում են միայն յուրաքանչյուր բառի առանձին հատկությունները: Մենք առաջարկում ենք էժան և հեշտ միջոց, որպեսզի բարձրացնենք այս մեթոդների արտադրողականությունը՝ ինտեգրելով բազմապատկած հատկությունները սովորաբար օգտագործվող ներկայացումների մեջ: Մենք տարբեր դասակարգերի և գնահատման կառուցվածքների միջոցով էքսպենսիվ գնահատում ենք, և առաջարկում ենք, որ աշխատանքի համար հարմար գնահատման կառուցվածք լինի, վերացնելով նախկինում գոյություն ունեցող կողմնակ', 'bn': 'কিন্তু সাম্প্রতিক কাজ প্রশ্ন করেছে যে এই পদ্ধতি দুই শব্দের মধ্যে একটি সম্পর্ক শিখতে পারে কিনা। বিশেষ করে লেভি এবং আল. (২০১৫) দাবি করেছেন যে লাইনিয়ার বিভাগ শ্রেণীরা শুধুমাত্র প্রতি শব্দের বৈশিষ্ট্য শিখেছ আমরা সাধারণ ব্যবহার করা প্রতিনিধিত্বে বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর প্রতিনিধিত্বে একত্রিত করে এই পদ্ধতির প্রভাব বৃদ্ধি কর আমরা বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন শ্রেণীবিদ্যালয় এবং মূল্যায়নের বিষয়বস্তুর সাথে ব্যাপকভাবে মূল্য প্রদান করি, এবং কাজের জন্য একটি যথাযথ মূল্যায়নে', 'az': 'Mühafizə edilmiş dağıtım metodları leksik dilində müvəffəqiyyətlə uygulanır, amma son işlər bu metodların iki söz arasındakı ilişkisini öyrənməsini soruşdu. Özellikle, Levy et al. (2015) linear klasifikatçılar hər sözün ayrı özelliklərini öyrənir. Biz bu metodların performansını artırmaq üçün ucuz və asan bir yolu təbliğ edirik, çoxlu fəaliyyətləri genellik istifadə edilən nümunələrə birləşdirərək. Biz müxtəlif klasifikatçılar və değerlendirmə qurğuları ilə geniş bir değerlendirmə təklif edirik, və bu işin üçün uyğun değerlendirmə qurğunu təklif edirik, əvvəlkilərdə olan tərzlərini silib aparırıq.', 'ca': "Els mètodes de distribució supervisats s'aplican amb èxit en l'involucració lèxica, però la feina recent es preguntava si aquests mètodes aprenen realment una relació entre dues paraules. Specificament, Levy et al. (2015) van afirmar que els classificadors linears només aprenen propietats separades de cada paraula. Sugirem una manera barata i fàcil de reforçar el rendiment d'aquests mètodes integrant característiques multiplicatives en representacions comunament utilitzades. Ens proporcionem una evaluació extensa amb diferents classificadors i configuracions d'evaluació, i suggerem una configuració d'evaluació adequada per a la tasca, eliminant els prejudicis existents en anteriors.", 'bs': 'Nadzorne distribucijske metode se uspješno primjenjuju u leksičkoj namjeri, ali nedavno radno pitanje je li te metode zapravo uče vezu između dvije riječi. Posebno, Levy et al. (2015) tvrdi da linearni klasifikatori nauče samo odvojene vlasništvo svake riječi. Predlažemo jeftin i lako način da povećamo učinkovitost tih metoda integriranjem multiplikativnih karakteristika u često korištene predstave. Mi pružamo ogromnu procjenu različitim klasifikatorima i nastavama procjene i predlažemo odgovarajuću procjenu za zadatak, eliminisanje predrasude koje postoje u prethodnim.', 'et': 'Juhendatud distributsioonimeetodeid rakendatakse edukalt leksikaalses kaasamises, kuid hiljutine töö küsis, kas need meetodid õpivad tegelikult kahe sõna vahelist seost. Täpsemalt väitsid Levy jt. (2015) et lineaarsed klassifitseerijad õpivad iga sõna ainult eraldi omadusi. Soovitame odavat ja lihtsat viisi nende meetodite jõudluse suurendamiseks, integreerides multiplikatiivsed funktsioonid üldkasutatavatesse esitustesse. Pakume laiaulatuslikku hindamist erinevate klassifitseerijate ja hindamisseadistustega ning pakume ülesandele sobivat hindamisseadistust, kõrvaldades eelmiste erapooletused.', 'cs': 'Dohlížené distribuční metody jsou úspěšně aplikovány v lexikální implikaci, ale nedávná práce se ptala, zda se tyto metody skutečně naučí vztah mezi dvěma slovy. Konkrétně Levy et al. (2015) tvrdil, že lineární klasifikátory se učí pouze samostatné vlastnosti každého slova. Navrhujeme levný a snadný způsob, jak zvýšit výkon těchto metod integrací multiplikativních rysů do běžně používaných reprezentací. Poskytujeme rozsáhlé hodnocení s různými klasifikátory a nastaveními hodnocení a navrhujeme vhodné nastavení hodnocení pro daný úkol, čímž eliminujeme zaujatosti existující v předchozích.', 'fi': 'Valvottuja jakelumenetelmiä sovelletaan menestyksekkäästi leksikaalisessa implikaatiossa, mutta viimeaikaisessa työssä kyseenalaistettiin, oppivatko nämä menetelmät oikeasti kahden sanan välistä suhdetta. Levy et al. (2015) väittivät erityisesti, että lineaariset luokittelijat oppivat vain erilliset ominaisuudet jokaisesta sanasta. Ehdotamme edullista ja helppoa tapaa parantaa näiden menetelmien suorituskykyä integroimalla multiplikaatiivisia ominaisuuksia yleisesti käytettyihin esityksiin. Tarjoamme kattavan arvioinnin erilaisilla luokittelijoilla ja arviointiasetuksilla sekä ehdotamme tehtävään sopivaa arviointijärjestelyä poistamalla aikaisemmissa ennakkoluuloja.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Ina ƙayyade, Leve et al. (2015) ya daidai cewa masu fassarar linjeri kawai suna karanta tayari masu daban-daban cikin kõwane magana. Munã ƙayyade hanya mai sauƙi da sauƙi zuwa a ƙara cikakken waɗannan hanyõyi da za'a haɗa wasu sifati masu yawa zuwa misãlai da ake amfani da. We provide an extensive evaluation with different classifiers and evaluation setups, and suggest a suitable evaluation setup for the task, eliminating biases existing in previous ones.", 'sk': 'Nadzorovane distribucijske metode se uspešno uporabljajo v leksikalni implikaciji, vendar se v nedavnem delu sprašuje, ali se te metode dejansko naučijo povezave med dvema besedama. Natančneje, Levy et al. (2015) trdijo, da linearni klasifikatorji učijo samo ločene lastnosti vsake besede. Predlagamo poceni in enostaven način za povečanje učinkovitosti teh metod z integracijo multiplikativnih funkcij v pogosto uporabljene reprezentacije. Zagotavljamo obsežno oceno z različnimi klasifikatorji in nastavitvami ocenjevanja ter predlagamo ustrezno ocenjevalno nastavitev za nalogo, s čimer odpravimo pristranskosti, ki obstajajo v prejšnjih.', 'he': 'שיטות פיצול משופעות משתמשות בהצלחה במערכת לקסיקה, אך העבודה האחרונה פקפקת אם השיטות האלה למעשה לומדים יחסים בין שתי מילים. במיוחד, Levy et al. (2015) טענו כי מסווגים לינריים לומדים רק תכונות נפרדות של כל מילה. אנו מציעים דרך זולה וקלה לגביר את ההפעלה של השיטות האלה על ידי האינטרגציה של תכונות כפולות לתוכניות משתמשות בדרך כלל. אנו מספקים עריכה רחבה עם מסווגים שונים ומערכות עריכה, ומצייעים עריכה מתאימה למשימה', 'jv': 'Distribution method politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngerasah akeh lan gampang kanggo nggawe akeh operasi iki dadi iki dadi panggayatan karo vector graphical Awak dhéwé ngewehke gunakake kategori lan akeh-kategori sing perusahaan karo nggawe lan gunakake setup nggawe layar kanggo nggawe task, njaluk kanggo ngilangno biasa layar kanggo sabên ono jih dumadhi.', 'bo': 'ལྟ་རྟོག་པ་དབྱེ་བ་དེ་ཚོར་ཡུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་བསལ་ནུས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་གསར་དུ་གོང་ལ་ཐབས དམིགས་བསལ་ན། Levy et al(2015)ཡིས་ཐིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཚོ་སོ་སོ་སོ་སོའི་ངོ་བོར་མི་ཤེས་ཐུབ་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དག་གི་འགྱུར་ཚད་འདི་དག་གི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཉམས་འཇུག་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་མིན་ལས་སླ་བསྡུར་ཐབས་མེད་པ་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་རིམ་པ་སྔོན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་ལྟར་རྒྱ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཉེན་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Deep Affix Features Improve Neural Named Entity Recognizers', 'fr': "Les fonctionnalités Deep Affix améliorent les fonctions de reconnaissance d'entités nommées neuronales", 'pt': 'Recursos de afixação profunda aprimoram os reconhecedores de entidades nomeadas neurais', 'ar': 'تعمل ميزات اللصق العميق على تحسين أدوات التعرف على الكيانات المسماة العصبية', 'es': 'Las funciones de Deep Affix mejoran los reconocedores neuronales de', 'zh': '深度贴功神经名实体识别器', 'ja': 'ディープアフィックス機能により、ニューラルネームのエンティティ認識機能が向上', 'hi': 'डीप Affix सुविधाएँ तंत्रिका नामित इकाई पहचानकर्ताओं में सुधार', 'ru': 'Функции глубокой фиксации Улучшение распознавателей нейронных именованных сущностей', 'ga': 'Feabhas a chur ar Aitheantóirí Aonáin Ainmnithe Néaracha', 'ka': 'ძალიან აფფიქსის ფექტურები ნეიროლური სახელი ელექტურების განახლებელება', 'hu': 'A Deep Affix funkciók javítják a neurális nevezett entitás felismerőit', 'kk': 'Қалыпты аффикс мүмкіндіктері нейралық аталған нысандарды анықтаушыларын жақсарту', 'el': 'Τα χαρακτηριστικά βαθιάς σύνδεσης βελτιώνουν τους αναγνωριστές νευρωνικών οντοτήτων με όνομα', 'mk': 'Функциите на длабокиот афикс ги подобруваат препознавачите на неурални ентитети', 'it': 'Migliora il riconoscimento delle entità con nomi neurali', 'ms': 'Ciri-ciri Afiksi Dalam Menembak Pengenal Entiti bernama Neural', 'lt': 'Gilaus poveikio požymiai gerina nervinių subjektų pripažinimą', 'mt': 'Il-Karatteristiċi ta’ Affiks Profond itejbu r-Rikonoxxituri ta’ Entità b’Ismijiet Newrali', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തിലെ ആഫിക്സിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d പേരിലുള്ള എന്റിറ്റിറ്റി പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий хэмжээсүүд мэдрэлийн нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognizers', 'ro': 'Caracteristicile Deep Affix îmbunătățesc recunoașterea entităților cu nume neurale', 'sr': 'Duboko Affiksni karakteristike poboljšavaju prepoznavanje neuronskog imena entiteta', 'pl': 'Funkcje Deep Affix poprawiają rozpoznawanie neuronalnych nazwanych podmiotów', 'so': 'Qaybaha Deg Affix Improve Neural Named Entity Recognizers', 'si': 'ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් විශේෂතාවක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිකාරකය', 'no': 'Deep Affiks- funksjonar forbedra nøyralt navn oppkjenningar', 'ta': 'ஆழம் ஆஃப்சரிக் செயல்பாடுகள்', 'sv': 'Deep Affix-funktioner Förbättra Neural Named Entity Recognitors', 'ur': 'عمیق آفریقس فکرات نیورال نام کی اینٹیٹی شناسانوں کو اضافہ کرتی ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Động cơ chìm chìm cơ sở hoàn toàn có tên gọi thần kinh', 'bg': 'Подобряват разпознавателите на неврални имена на субекти', 'nl': 'Diepe affix functies verbeteren Neural Named Entity Recognizers', 'hr': 'Duboko Affiksni karakteristike poboljšavaju prepoznavanje neuronskog imena entiteta', 'da': 'Deep Affix-funktioner forbedrer genkendere af neurale navngivne enheder', 'de': 'Deep Affix Features verbessern die Erkennung neuronaler benannter Entitäten', 'id': 'Karakteristik Afiks Dalam meningkatkan Pengenal Entitas bernama Neural', 'ko': '깊이 있는 접미사 특징은 신경 명칭 실체 식별기를 개선시켰다', 'tr': 'Saýlaw Mazmunlar', 'af': 'Deep Affiks Funksies Verbeter Neurale Genaamde Eenheidrekenaars', 'fa': 'ویژگی\u200cهای عمیق آفرینش\u200cها، شناختن عناصر عصبی را بهتر می\u200cکند', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Deep Affix Features Improve Neural Named Entity Recognizers', 'hy': 'Խաղ աֆիքսի ֆունկցիաները բարելավում են նյարդային անվանվող անհատականությունների ճանաչողները', 'sw': 'Tamko za Kikina', 'bn': 'গভীর আফ্রিক্স বৈশিষ্ট্য নিউরাল নামের প্রতিষ্ঠানকারীদের উন্নতি করো', 'ca': "Les característiques d'afecció profunda milloren els reconeixedors d'entitats anomenades neuronals", 'az': 'Derin Affiks Features Improved Neural Named Entity Recognizers', 'bs': 'Duboko Affiksno funkcije poboljšavaju prepoznavanje neuronskog imena entiteta', 'cs': 'Funkce Deep Affix zlepšují rozpoznávání nervových jmenovaných entit', 'fi': 'Deep Affix -ominaisuudet parantavat neuraalisten nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistimia', 'et': 'Deep Affix funktsioonid Parandavad neuraalse nimega olemi tuvastajaid', 'jv': 'deep Affixed Attribute', 'ha': 'Deep Affix Features Improve Neural Named Entity Recognizers', 'sk': 'Funkcije Deep Affix izboljšajo prepoznavalce nevralnih imen entitet', 'he': 'תכונות התקף עמוקות משתפרות זיהוי איכויות בשם נוירולי', 'bo': 'ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཆོས་དྲག་ཀྱིས་Neural Named Entity Recognizer'}
{'en': 'We propose a practical model for named entity recognition (NER) that combines word and character-level information with a specific learned representation of the prefixes and suffixes of the word. We apply this approach to multilingual and multi-domain NER and show that it achieves state of the art results on the CoNLL 2002 Spanish and Dutch and CoNLL 2003 German NER datasets, consistently achieving 1.5-2.3 percent over the state of the art without relying on any dictionary features. Additionally, we show improvement on SemEval 2013 task 9.1 DrugNER, achieving state of the art results on the MedLine dataset and the second best results overall (-1.3 % from state of the art). We also establish a new benchmark on the I2B2 2010 Clinical NER dataset with 84.70 F-score.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذجًا عمليًا للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) الذي يجمع المعلومات على مستوى الكلمات والحرف مع تمثيل محدد تم تعلمه لبادئات ولواحق الكلمة. نطبق هذا النهج على NER متعدد اللغات ومتعدد المجالات ونبين أنه يحقق أحدث النتائج على مجموعات بيانات CoNLL 2002 الإسبانية والهولندية و CoNLL 2003 الألمانية NER ، ويحقق باستمرار 1.5-2.3 في المائة على أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا دون الاعتماد على أي ميزات القاموس. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نظهر تحسنًا في مهمة SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER ، وحققنا أحدث النتائج على مجموعة بيانات MedLine وثاني أفضل النتائج بشكل عام (-1.3٪ من أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا). وضعنا أيضًا معيارًا جديدًا لمجموعة بيانات I2B2 2010 Clinical NER مع 84.70 درجة F.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un modèle pratique de reconnaissance d'entité nommée (NER) qui combine des informations au niveau des mots et des caractères avec une représentation apprise spécifique des préfixes et suffixes du mot. Nous appliquons cette approche au NER multilingue et multidomaine et montrons qu'elle permet d'obtenir des résultats de pointe sur les ensembles de données NER espagnol et néerlandais ConLL 2002 et allemand de ConLL 2003, atteignant régulièrement 1,5 à 2,3\xa0% par rapport à l'état de l'art sans dépendre des fonctionnalités du dictionnaire. De plus, nous montrons une amélioration de la tâche 9.1 Drugner de SemEval 2013, en obtenant des résultats de pointe sur le jeu de données MedLine et les deuxièmes meilleurs résultats globaux (-1,3\xa0% par rapport à l'état de l'art). Nous établissons également un nouveau point de référence sur l'ensemble de données NER clinique I2B2 2010 avec un score F de 84,70.", 'pt': 'Propomos um modelo prático para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) que combina informações de nível de palavra e caractere com uma representação específica aprendida dos prefixos e sufixos da palavra. Aplicamos essa abordagem a NER multilíngue e multidomínio e mostramos que ela alcança resultados de última geração nos conjuntos de dados CoNLL 2002 espanhol e holandês e CoNLL 2003 alemão NER, alcançando consistentemente 1,5-2,3 por cento sobre o estado da arte sem depender de quaisquer recursos de dicionário. Além disso, mostramos melhorias na tarefa 9.1 DrugNER do SemEval 2013, alcançando resultados de última geração no conjunto de dados MedLine e o segundo melhor resultado geral (-1,3% do estado da arte). Também estabelecemos uma nova referência no conjunto de dados I2B2 2010 Clinical NER com 84,70 F-score.', 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo práctico para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) que combina información a nivel de palabras y caracteres con una representación específica aprendida de los prefijos y sufijos de la palabra. Aplicamos este enfoque a la NER multilingüe y multidominio y demostramos que logra resultados de vanguardia en los conjuntos de datos de NER en español y holandés de CoNll 2002 y alemán de ConLL 2003, alcanzando consistentemente entre 1,5 y 2,3 por ciento por encima del estado de la técnica sin depender de ninguna función del diccionario. Además, mostramos mejoras en la tarea 9.1 Drugner de SemEval 2013, logrando resultados de vanguardia en el conjunto de datos de MedLine y los segundos mejores resultados en general (-1,3% del estado del arte). También establecemos un nuevo punto de referencia en el conjunto de datos de NER clínica I2B2 2010 con un puntaje F de 84.70.', 'ru': 'Предложена практическая модель распознавания именованных сущностей (NER), объединяющая информацию на уровне слов и символов с конкретным усвоенным представлением префиксов и суффиксов слова. Мы применяем этот подход к многоязычному и многодоменному NER и показываем, что он достигает современных результатов на наборах данных CoNLL 2002 испанский и голландский и CoNLL 2003 немецкий NER, последовательно достигая 1,5-2,3 процента по сравнению с современным уровнем, не полагаясь на какие-либо особенности словаря. Кроме того, мы демонстрируем улучшение по задаче 9.1 DrugNER SemEval 2013, достигая современных результатов по набору данных MedLine и вторых лучших результатов в целом (-1,3% от современных). Мы также устанавливаем новый контрольный показатель в наборе данных клинического NER I2B2 2010 с 84,70 баллами по шкале F.', 'ja': '私たちは、単語と文字レベルの情報を、単語の接頭辞と接尾辞の特定の学習された表現と組み合わせる、名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）のための実用的なモデルを提案します。私たちは、このアプローチを多言語およびマルチドメインNERに適用し、CoNLL 2002スペインおよびオランダのデータセットとCoNLL 2003ドイツのNERデータセットで最先端の結果を達成し、辞書の機能に依存することなく最先端の1.5 ～ 2.3パーセントを一貫して達成していることを示しています。さらに、我々は、SemEval 2013タスク9.1 DrugNERの改善を示し、MedLineデータセット上で最先端の結果を達成し、全体で2番目に良い結果を達成しました（最先端から-1.3 ％ ）。また、84.70 FスコアのI 2 B 2 2010臨床NERデータセットに新しいベンチマークを設定します。', 'zh': '立实识(NER),以单词与单词前缀,与后缀特定学合。 宜用于多言多域NER,明其于CoNLL 2002西班牙语、荷兰语及CoNLL 2003德语NER数集上先进,不恃一字典之功,终始如一1.5-2.3%之先入也。 此外,SemEval 2013务9.1 DrugNER改进,于MedLine数集上得最先进,总第二(-1.3%)。 又于I2B2 2010临床NER数集上立一新基,分为84.70 F。', 'hi': 'हम नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) के लिए एक व्यावहारिक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो शब्द के उपसर्गों और प्रत्ययों के एक विशिष्ट सीखा प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ शब्द और चरित्र-स्तर की जानकारी को जोड़ता है। हम बहुभाषी और बहु-डोमेन एनईआर के लिए इस दृष्टिकोण को लागू करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि यह CoNLL 2002 स्पैनिश और डच और CoNLL 2003 जर्मन एनईआर डेटासेट पर कला परिणामों की स्थिति को प्राप्त करता है, लगातार किसी भी शब्दकोश सुविधाओं पर भरोसा किए बिना कला की स्थिति पर 1.5-2.3 प्रतिशत प्राप्त करता है। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम SemEval 2013 कार्य 9.1 DrugNER पर सुधार दिखाते हैं, MedLine डेटासेट पर कला परिणामों की स्थिति प्राप्त करते हैं और कुल मिलाकर दूसरा सबसे अच्छा परिणाम (कला के राज्य से -1.3%)। हम 84.70 एफ-स्कोर के साथ I2B2 2010 क्लिनिकल एनईआर डेटासेट पर एक नया बेंचमार्क भी स्थापित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Molaimid samhail phraiticiúil le haghaidh aitheantais aonáin ainmnithe (NER) a chomhcheanglaíonn faisnéis ar leibhéal na bhfocal agus na gcarachtar le léiriú sainiúil foghlamtha ar réimíreanna agus iarmhíreanna an fhocail. Cuirimid an cur chuige seo i bhfeidhm ar NER ilteangach agus ilfhearann agus léirímid go mbaineann sé torthaí den scoth amach ar thacair sonraí CoNLL 2002 Spáinnis agus Ollainnis agus CoNLL 2003 Gearmáinis NER, ag baint amach go comhsheasmhach 1.5-2.3 faoin gcéad thar an úrscothacht gan brath ar. aon ghnéithe foclóir. Ina theannta sin, léirímid feabhas ar thasc SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, ag baint amach torthaí den scoth ar thacar sonraí MedLine agus an dara torthaí is fearr san iomlán (-1.3% ón úrscothacht). Bunóimid freisin tagarmharc nua ar thacar sonraí Cliniciúil NER I2B2 2010 le scór F 84.70.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრექტიკური მოდელს სახელი ინტერტიკის განაცნობისთვის (NER), რომელიც სიტყვის და სიტყვის-დონეზე ინფორმაციას კონფიგურირებული განაცნობისთვის პრეფიქსის და სფექსის გამოყენ ჩვენ ამ პროგრამა მრავალური და მრავალური დიომინური NER-ზე აყენებთ და ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აყენებთ, რომ ის მიიღება ხელსაწყოთა შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგები დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ SemEval 2013 საქმე 9.1 DrugNER-ის გაუკეთებას ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ასევე დავყენებთ ახალი ბანქმერი I2B2 2010 კლინიკური NER მონაცემების შესახებ 84,70 F-score.', 'hu': 'Gyakorlati modellt javasolunk a nevezett entitás felismerésére (NER), amely kombinálja a szó- és karakterszintű információkat a szó előtagjainak és utótagjainak speciális megtanult ábrázolásával. Ezt a megközelítést alkalmazzuk a többnyelvű és több domain NER esetében, és megmutatjuk, hogy a CoNLL 2002 spanyol és holland és CoNLL 2003 német NER adatkészleteken a legkorszerűbb eredményeket ér el, következetesen 1,5-2,3 százalékot érve el a legkorszerűbb technológiában anélkül, hogy bármilyen szótár funkciót használna. Továbbá javulást mutatunk a SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER feladatához képest, elérve a MedLine adatkészleten a legkorszerűbb eredményeket és összességében a második legjobb eredményeket (-1,3% a legkorszerűbb technológiából). Az I2B2 2010 klinikai NER adatkészleten 84,70 F pontszámmal új referenciaértéket állítunk fel.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα πρακτικό μοντέλο αναγνώρισης ονομαστικών οντοτήτων (το οποίο συνδυάζει πληροφορίες σε επίπεδο λέξης και χαρακτήρων με μια συγκεκριμένη μαθημένη αναπαράσταση των προθέσεων και επιθέσεων της λέξης. Εφαρμόζουμε αυτή την προσέγγιση σε πολυγλωσσικό και πολυγλωσσικό και καταδεικνύουμε ότι επιτυγχάνει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στα ισπανικά και ολλανδικά και γερμανικά σύνολα δεδομένων επιτυγχάνοντας σταθερά 1.5-2.3 τοις εκατό πάνω από την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας χωρίς να βασίζεται σε οποιαδήποτε χαρακτηριστικά λεξικού. Επιπλέον, δείχνουμε βελτίωση στην εργασία 9.1 επιτυγχάνοντας αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο σύνολο δεδομένων και το δεύτερο καλύτερο συνολικά (-1.3% από την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας). Επίσης, θεσπίζουμε ένα νέο σημείο αναφοράς για το σύνολο δεδομένων με 84.70 Φ-βαθμολογία.', 'it': "Proponiamo un modello pratico per il riconoscimento delle entità denominate (NER) che combina informazioni a livello di parola e carattere con una rappresentazione specifica appresa dei prefissi e suffissi della parola. Applichiamo questo approccio al NER multilingue e multi-dominio e dimostriamo che raggiunge risultati all'avanguardia sui set di dati NER spagnoli e olandesi CoNLL 2002 e tedeschi CoNLL 2003, raggiungendo costantemente l'1,5-2,3% rispetto allo stato dell'arte senza contare su alcuna funzionalità del dizionario. Inoltre, abbiamo mostrato miglioramenti sul task 9.1 DrugNER SemEval 2013, ottenendo risultati all'avanguardia sul dataset MedLine e il secondo miglior risultato complessivo (-1,3% dallo stato dell'arte). Stabiliamo anche un nuovo benchmark sul set di dati I2B2 2010 Clinical NER con 84,70 F-score.", 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan model praktik untuk pengenalan entiti bernama (NER) yang menggabungkan maklumat perkataan dan aras aksara dengan perwakilan tertentu belajar bagi awalan dan suffiks perkataan. Kami menerapkan pendekatan ini kepada NER berbilang bahasa dan berbilang-domain dan menunjukkan bahawa ia mencapai keputusan terbaik pada set data NER CoNLL 2002 Sepanyol dan Belanda dan CoNLL 2003 Jerman, secara konsisten mencapai 1.5-2.3 peratus atas keadaan seni tanpa bergantung pada mana-mana ciri kamus. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan peningkatan pada SemEval 2013 tugas 9.1 DrugNER, mencapai keputusan terbaik pada set data MedLine dan keputusan terbaik kedua secara keseluruhan (-1.3% dari keadaan terbaik). Kami juga menetapkan benchmark baru pada set data Klinik NER I2B2 2010 dengan skor F 84.70.', 'lt': 'Siūlome praktinį vardinio subjekto pripažinimo (NER) model į, kuris sujungia žodžio ir simbolio lygmens informaciją su konkrečiu išmoktu žodžio prefiksų ir suffiksų atstovavimu. Taikome šį požiūrį daugiakalbėms ir daugiadominėms NER sritims ir parodome, kad ji pasiekia pažangiausius rezultatus dėl 2002 m. CoNLL Ispanijos ir Nyderlandų bei 2003 m. CoNLL Vokietijos NER duomenų rinkinių, nuosekliai siekdama 1,5–2,3 proc. didesnių nei pažangiausios technologijos, nepaisant jokių žodynų savybių. Be to, mes parodome pagerėjimą pagal SemEval 2013 užduotį 9.1 DrugNER, pasiekti pažangiausius MedLine duomenų rinkinio rezultatus ir antrąjį geriausią bendrą rezultatą (-1,3 % nuo pažangiausių). Taip pat nustatome naują I2B2 2010 m. klinikinių NER duomenų rinkinį, kuriame nustatytas 84,70 F balas.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме практичен модел за препознавање на именуваниот ентитет (NER) кој ги комбинира информациите на зборот и ниво на карактер со специфична научена претстава на префиксите и суфиксите на зборот. Ние го применуваме овој пристап на мултијазични и мултидомени НЕР и покажуваме дека постигнува најсовремени резултати на коNLL 2002 шпански и холандски и CoNLL 2003 германски НЕР податоци, постојано постигнувајќи 1,5-2,3 проценти над најсовремената технологија без да се потпираат на никакви речници. Покрај тоа, покажуваме подобрување на задачата SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, постигнувајќи најсовремени резултати на наборот на податоци MedLine и вторите најдобри резултати вкупно (-1,3 отсто од најсовремените). Ние, исто така, воспоставуваме нов референциски резултат за клиничкиот НЕР податок I2B2 2010 со 84,70 ф-оценка.', 'ml': 'വാക്കും അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ നില വിവരങ്ങളും വിശദീകരിച്ച വിവരങ്ങളും വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രിഫിക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള നമ്മള്\u200d പല ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പല-ഡോമെന്\u200d നെആരിലേക്കും ഈ വഴി പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. കോണ്\u200dഎല്\u200d 2002 സ്പാനിഷും ഡച്ചും 2003 ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d നെആര്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റേറ്റുകളിലെ കലാക്കങ്ങളുടെ അവസ്ഥ നേടുന്നു എന്ന് കാണിക്കുന കൂടാതെ, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2013 ജോലി 9. 1 ഡ്രുഗ്നെരില്\u200d മെഡ്ലൈന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ കലാകൃത്യങ്ങളുടെ അവസ്ഥ പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടാമത്തെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മൊത്ത ഐ2B2 2010 ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d നെആര്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d പുതിയ ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് നാം സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നു. 84.70 എഫ് സ്കോര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Aħna qed nipproponu mudell prattiku għar-rikonoxximent tal-entità msejħa (NER) li jgħaqqad l-informazzjoni dwar il-kelma u l-livell tal-karattru ma’ rappreżentazzjoni speċifika magħrufa tal-prefessi u s-suffissi tal-kelma. We apply this approach to multilingual and multi-domain NER and show that it achieves state of the art results on the CoNLL 2002 Spanish and Dutch and CoNLL 2003 German NER datasets, consistently achieving 1.5-2.3 percent over the state of the art without relying on any dictionary features.  Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu titjib dwar il-kompitu ta’ SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, li jiksbu r-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati fis-sett tad-dejta MedLine u t-tieni l-aħjar riżultati b’mod ġenerali (-1.3% mill-aktar avvanzati). Nistabbilixxu wkoll punt ta’ riferiment ġdid dwar is-sett tad-dejta tal-I2B2 2010 Clinical NER b’punteġġ F ta’ 84.70.', 'mn': 'Бид нэрлэгдсэн бүтээлүүдийн танихын практикийн загвар (НЕР) гэдэг нь үг болон хариу дүнгийн мэдээллийг тодорхой ойлгомжтой хэлбэртэй холбоотой. Бид үүнийг олон хэлний, олон домжтой NER-д ашиглаж, 2002 оны CoNLL 2002 оны Испан, Далланд, CoNLL 2003 оны Герман НЕР өгөгдлийн сангийн үзүүлэлт дээр урлагийн төвшин дээр 1.5-2.3 хувь хүртэл өгөгдлийн хувьд ямар ч үгүйлтэй байхгүй урлагийн үр дүнг гаргаж ча Мөн бид SemEval 2013 оны ажил 9.1 DrugNER-ын сайжруулалтыг харуулж, MedLine өгөгдлийн сангийн урлагийн үр дүн гаргаж, хоёр дахь хамгийн сайхан үр дүн нь нийтэд (-1.3% урлагийн байдал). Мөн бид 2010 оны I2B2-ын клиникийн НЕР өгөгдлийн сан дээр 84.70 Ф-тооны шинэ багц бүтээсэн.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit praktisk modell for gjenkjenning av namnet entitet (NER) som kombinerer informasjon om ordet og teikn- nivå med eit spesifikke lært representasjon av prefiksa og suffiksar av ordet. Vi bruker denne tilnærminga til fleire språk og fleire domene NER og viser at det gjer tilstand til kunstresultatene på datasettet CoNLL 2002, spansk og nederlandsk og CoNLL 2003, tyske NER-datasett, som konsekvent gjer 1,5-2,3 prosent over kunstået utan å pålite på noen ordbokfunksjonar. I tillegg viser vi forbedringar på oppgåva 9.1 DrugNER for semiEval 2013, som gjer tilstand til kunstresultatene på MedLine-datasettet og den andre beste resultatene overalt (-1.3% frå kunsttilstanden). Vi oppretter også ein ny benchmarkt på I2B2 2010 klinisk NER-datasettet med 84,70 F-poeng.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy praktyczny model rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek (NER), który łączy informacje na poziomie słowa i znaków z konkretną nauczoną reprezentacją prefiksów i przyrostków słowa. Stosujemy to podejście do wielojęzycznego i wieloodzenowego NER i pokazujemy, że osiąga ono najnowocześniejsze wyniki na temat hiszpańskich i holenderskich zbiorów danych CoNLL 2002 oraz CoNLL 2003 niemieckich NER, konsekwentnie osiągając 1.5-2.3 procent w stosunku do stanu techniki bez polegania na jakichkolwiek funkcjach słownika. Dodatkowo pokazujemy poprawę zadania SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, osiągając najnowocześniejsze wyniki na zbiorze danych MedLine oraz drugie najlepsze wyniki ogólnie (-1.3% od stanu techniki). Ustalamy również nowy punkt odniesienia dla zbioru danych I2B2 2010 Clinical NER z wynikiem 84.70 F.', 'ro': 'Propunem un model practic pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) care combină informațiile la nivel de cuvânt și caracter cu o reprezentare specifică învățată a prefixurilor și sufixelor cuvântului. Aplicăm această abordare la NER multilingv și multi-domeniu și arătăm că acesta obține rezultate de ultimă oră pe seturile de date CoNLL 2002 spaniolă și olandeză și CoNLL 2003 germană NER, atingând în mod constant 1,5-2,3% peste starea de tehnologie fără a se baza pe caracteristicile dicționarului. În plus, am arătat îmbunătățiri față de sarcina SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, obținând rezultate de ultimă generație pe setul de date MedLine și cele de-a doua cele mai bune rezultate generale (-1,3% din state of the art). De asemenea, stabilim un nou benchmark pentru setul de date I2B2 2010 Clinical NER cu scor 84.70 F.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo praktični model priznanja entiteta (NER) koji kombinira informacije o reči i nivou karaktera sa specifičnim naučenim predstavljanjem prefiksa i sufiksa reči. Primjenjujemo ovaj pristup multijezičkom i multidomenom NER-u i pokažemo da postigne stanje rezultata umjetnosti na španjolskim i holandskim i CoNLL-ovim podacima CoNLL 2002. godine i nemačkim NER-ovim podacima 2003. godine, konsekventno postižeći 1,5-2,3 posto iznad stanja umjetnosti bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve karakteristike rečnika. Osim toga, pokazujemo poboljšanje zadatka od semiEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, postižeći stanje rezultata umjetnosti na setu podataka MedLine i drugim najboljim rezultatima ukupno (-1.3% od stanja umjetnosti). Također smo uspostavili novu kritiku na I2B2 2010 Kliničkom setu podataka NER sa 84,70 F rezultata.', 'kk': 'Біз сөз мен таңбалар деңгейіндегі мәліметін біріктіретін префикстер мен сөздің жұрнақтарын біріктіретін практикалық үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біз бұл тәсілді бірнеше тілді және бірнеше доменге қолданып, 2002 жыл CoNLL 2002 жылы Испан және Нидерландық және CoNLL 2003 жылы неміс NER деректер қорларының күйіне жеткізіп, ол сөздік мүмкіндіктеріне көмектеспей 1,5-2,3 пайызын жеткізед Сонымен қатар, біз бұл тапсырма 9.1 ДрагNER дегенді жақсартып, MedLine деректер жиынындағы әртүрлі нәтижелердің күйін жеткіземіз және екінші ең жақсы нәтижелерді жасап көрсетедік (-1.3% суреттің күйін Біз сондай-ақ I2B2 2010 клиникалық NER деректер жинағында 84,70 F-нүкте жаңа балансы құрылдық.', 'so': 'Tusaale tababar ah oo lagu magacaabay aqoonsiga entity (NER) kaas oo ku soo ururiya macluumaadka hadalka iyo heerka aqoonta ee xarafka lagu bartay qaab gaar ah oo ku qoran qalabka iyo qeybaha ereyga. Waxaynu u isticmaalnaa qaababkan xagga NER ee luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo kuwa kala duduwan, waxaana tusnaa inay dhamaadaan xaalada arimaha farshaxanka ee CoNLL 2002 Isbanish iyo Dutch iyo CoNLL 2003, oo dhamaantood waxay gaadhaa 1.5-2.3 boqolkiiba xaaladda farshaxanka, iyadoon ku kalsoonaan tayada luqada ah. Sidoo kale, horumarinta shaqada SemEval 2013 oo 9.1 DrugNER ayaannu tusnaynaa, si aan u helno xaaladda arimaha farshaxanka ee danbiyada MedLine iyo resultiyada labaad ee ugu wanaagsan dhammaantood (-1.3% ka yimaado xaalada farshaxanka). We also establish a new benchmark on the I2B2 2010 Clinical NER dataset with 84.70 F-score.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en praktisk modell för namngiven entitetsigenkänning (NER) som kombinerar ord- och teckeninformation med en specifik lärd representation av prefix och suffix i ordet. Vi tillämpar detta tillvägagångssätt på flerspråkig och flerdomäns NER och visar att den uppnår toppmoderna resultat på CoNLL 2002 spanska och nederländska och CoNLL 2003 tyska NER datauppsättningar, konsekvent uppnår 1,5-2,3 procent över toppmodern teknik utan att förlita sig på några ordlista funktioner. Dessutom visar vi förbättring av SemEval 2013 uppgift 9.1 DrugNER, uppnående toppmoderna resultat på MedLine datauppsättningen och näst bästa resultat totalt (-1,3% från state of the art). Vi fastställer också ett nytt riktmärke för I2B2 2010 Clinical NER dataset med 84,70 F-poäng.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා නම් අයිති අයිති අඳුරණය (NER) සඳහා වචන සහ අක්ෂර- තත්වයක් තොරතුරු සමග විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ස අපි මේක ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් සහ ගොඩක් ඩෝමින් NER වලට භාවිතා කරනවා ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නෙ ඒක CoNLL 2002 ස්පැනිල් සහ ඩච්ච් සහ CoNLL 2003 ජර්මන් NER දත්ත සේට් වලට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබ තවත්, අපි සෙම්වේල් 2013 වැඩේ 9.1 DrugNER වලට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්, Medline දත්ත සූදානයේ කලාවේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d අපි අලුත් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක ස්ථාපනය කරනවා I2B2 2010 විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය NER දත්ත සැට 84.70 F-score එක්ක.', 'ta': 'நாம் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளத்திற்கான ஒரு செயல்பாட்டின் மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது சொல்லை மற்றும் எழுத்து நிலையின் தகவலை  நாம் பல மொழி மற்றும் பல- domain NER க்கு இந்த வழியை பயன்படுத்தி காண்பிக்கிறோம் அது 2002 ஸ்பானிஷ் மற்றும் டாந்த் மற்றும் 2003 ஜெர்மன் NER தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் நிலையை பெறுகிறது என்பதைக் காட்டுகிறது என்பதைக் க கூடுதலாக, SemEval 2013 பணியில் முன்னேற்றத்தை காட்டுகிறோம், மெட்லைன் தகவல் அமைப்பில் கலை முடிவுகள் நிலையை பெறுகிறது மற்றும் இரண்டாவது சிறந்த முடிவுகள் மொத நாம் இன்னும் I2B2 2010 சிறப்பு NER தகவல் அமைப்பில் ஒரு புதிய பெங்குருக்கு நிறுவுகிறோம் 84.70 F-score.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک قابل موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جن کا نام ایک ایست کی شناسایی (NER) ہے جو کلمات اور شخصت سطح کی معلومات کو ایک خاص علم کی پیشنهاد اور کلمات کے اثرات کے ساتھ جمع کرتا ہے. ہم اس طریقہ کو multilingual and multi-domain NER کے لئے لازم کرتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ CoNLL 2002 کے اسپانیایی اور ڈرچ اور CoNLL 2003 کے جرمن نیر ڈاٹ سٹ پر موجود ہوتا ہے، جو آهنت کی حالت پر 1.5-2.3 فیصد تک پہنچ رہا ہے بغیر کسی لکھنے کے۔ اور اضافہ، ہم SemEval 2013 task 9.1 DrugNER پر بہترین ترتیب دکھاتے ہیں، مدلین ڈیٹ سٹ کے هنر نتیجے کو پہنچ رہے ہیں اور دوسرے بہترین نتیجے بالکل (-1.3% هنر کی حالت سے)۔ ہم نے بھی I2B2 2010 کلینیک نیر ڈیٹسٹ پر ایک نئی بنچم مارک ایجاد کی 84.70 F-اسکور کے ساتھ۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình thực tế cho việc nhận dạng thực thể tên (NER) mà kết hợp các thông tin từ và mức ký tự với một sự đại diện rõ ràng của từ đó và đủ từ. Chúng tôi áp dụng phương pháp này cho các môi trường đa dạng và đa lãnh thổ rộng lớn và cho thấy nó đạt được kết quả hiện đại nhất về giá trị nghệ thuật trong ban dữ liệu quốc xã CoNL và Dutch và CoNbóng rổ hồng cầu tối Đức, liên tục đạt được 1.5-2.3 theo chiều cao của nghệ thuật mà không dựa vào các tính năng từ điển. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi thấy tiến bộ hơn với nhiệm vụ SemEvol diễn ra 9.1 DrugNER, đạt được kết quả hiện đại trên tập tin MedLine và kết quả tốt thứ hai trên toàn bộ (-1.3=) từ trạng thái nghệ thuật). Chúng tôi cũng thiết lập một tiêu chuẩn mới về dữ liệu trong phạm vi chung I2B2 April với 84.70.', 'uz': "We propose a practical model for named entity recognition (NER) that combines word and character-level information with a specific learned representation of the prefixes and suffixes of the word.  Biz bu usulni bir necha tillar va bir necha domen NER'ga qo'llamiz va u 2002 Ispanish va Dutch va 2003 Olmon NER maʼlumotlar tartiblarini ko'rsatdik. Bu bir xil tili va ko'pgina domen tartiblarini ko'rsatamiz va bu shaxsiy xossalariga ishlatmaydi. Ko'pchilik, SemEval 2013 vazifani 9.1 Dollar bilan yaxshi ko'ramiz, MedLine maʼlumotlar bazasini bajarish va ikkinchi eng eng yaxshi natijalar umumiy (- 1.3% art holatidan). Biz I2B2 2010 Klinik NER maʼlumotlar soni 84.70 F scori bilan yangi benchmark qoʻllamiz.", 'bg': 'Предлагаме практически модел за разпознаване на наименовани субекти (НЕР), който съчетава информация на ниво дума и знак със специфично научено представяне на предфиксите и наставките на думата. Ние прилагаме този подход към многоезичната и многодомейнната нервна система и показваме, че тя постига най-съвременни резултати за наборите от данни на испански и холандски език и немски език, последователно постигайки 1,5-2,3% над най-съвременната технология, без да разчитаме на никакви функции на речника. Освен това, показваме подобрение по задача 9.1 постигайки най-съвременни резултати в набора от данни и втория най-добър резултат като цяло (-1.3% от най-съвременните). Ние също така установяваме нов референтен показател за набора от данни I2B2 2010 Клиничен НЕР с 84,70 F-score.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en praktisk model for navngivet entitetsgenkendelse (NER), der kombinerer ord- og tegneniveau information med en specifik lært repræsentation af præfikser og suffikser af ordet. Vi anvender denne tilgang til flersprogede og multi-domæne NER og viser, at det opnår state of te art resultater på CoNLL 2002 spansk og hollandsk og CoNLL 2003 tyske NER datasæt, konsekvent opnår 1,5-2,3 procent over state of te art uden at stole på nogen ordbogfunktioner. Derudover viser vi forbedringer på SemEval 2013 opgave 9.1 DrugNER, der opnår state of te art resultater på MedLine datasættet og næstbedste resultater generelt (-1,3% fra state of te art). Vi etablerer også et nyt benchmark på I2B2 2010 Clinical NER datasæt med 84,70 F-score.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo praktični model priznanja entiteta (NER) koji kombinira informacije o razini riječi i karaktera sa specifičnim učenim predstavljanjem prefiksa i pristupa riječi. Primjenjujemo ovaj pristup multijezičkom i multidomenom NER-u i pokazujemo da postigne stanje rezultata umjetnosti na podacima podataka CoNLL 2002. godine španjolskog i holandskog i CoNLL 2003. Njemačkog NER-a, koji je stalno postigao 1,5-2,3 posto iznad stanja umjetnosti bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve karakteristike riječi. Osim toga, pokazujemo poboljšanje zadatka za semiEval 2013. 9.1 DrugNER, postići stanje rezultata umjetnosti na setu podataka MedLine i drugim najboljim rezultatima ukupno (-1.3% od stanja umjetnosti). Također smo uspostavili novu kriteriju I2B2 2010 Kliničke podatke NER sa 84,70 F rezultata.', 'nl': 'We stellen een praktisch model voor naamloze entiteitsherkenning (NER) voor dat woord- en tekeninformatie combineert met een specifieke geleerde weergave van de voorvoegsels en achtervoegsels van het woord. We passen deze aanpak toe op meertalige en multi-domein NER en laten zien dat het state-of-the-art resultaten behaalt op de CoNLL 2002 Spaanse en Nederlandse en CoNLL 2003 Duitse NER datasets, waarbij consistent 1.5-2.3 procent bereikt wordt over de stand van de techniek zonder afhankelijk te zijn van woordenboekfuncties. Daarnaast laten we verbeteringen zien op SemEval 2013 taak 9.1 DrugNER, het bereiken van state of the art resultaten op de MedLine dataset en de op één na beste resultaten over het algemeen (-1.3% van state of the art). We zetten ook een nieuwe benchmark op de I2B2 2010 Clinical NER dataset met 84.70 F-score.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل عملی برای شناسایی یک entity نامیده شده (NER) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که اطلاعات کلمه و سطح شخصیت را با یک نمایش مشخص یاد گرفته از پیشنهاد و اثرات کلمه را ترکیب می\u200cکند. ما این روش را به NER multilingual and multi-domain وابسته می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که آن به حالت نتیجه هنری در مجموعه\u200cهای اسپانیایی و هلندی ۲۰۰۲ و CoNLL ۲۰۰۳ از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای NER آلمانی می\u200cرسد، که همیشه ۱.۵-۲.۳ درصد در حالت هنر بدون توجه به هیچ ویژه\u200c اضافه\u200cای از این، ما در وظیفه\u200cی نیمه\u200cای ۲۰۱۳ به بهترین برنامه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهیم که موقعیت نتیجه\u200cهای هنری در مجموعه داده\u200cهای مدلین و نتیجه\u200cهای دومین بهترین عمومی (-1.3% از وضعیت هنر) رسیده\u200cایم. ما همچنین یک مقدار جدید روی مجموعه داده های NER کلینیکی I2B2 ۲۰۰۰ با شماره ۸۴.۷۰ فی ایجاد کردیم.', 'ko': '우리는 단어와 문자 수준의 정보를 단어의 접두사와 접두사의 특정한 학습 표시와 결합시키는 실용적인 명칭 실체 식별 모델(NER)을 제시했다.우리는 이러한 방법을 다언어와 다분야의 NER에 응용하고 CoNLL 2002 스페인어와 네덜란드어, 그리고 CoNLL 2003 독일어 NER 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 실현하였으며 어떠한 사전 기능에 의존하지 않는 상황에서 시종일관 가장 선진적인 수준인 1.5-2.3%에 이르렀다는 것을 나타낸다.또한 SemEval 2013 task 9.1 DrugNER의 개선을 보여줌으로써 MedLine 데이터 세트에서 가장 앞선 결과를 달성했고 전체적으로 두 번째로 좋은 결과(-1.3%)를 얻었다.우리는 또한 I2B2 2010 임상 NER 데이터 집합에 새로운 기준을 세웠는데 F 점수는 84.70이다.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein praktisches Modell für Named Entity Recognition (NER) vor, das Wort- und Zeicheninformationen mit einer spezifischen erlernten Darstellung der Präfixe und Suffixe des Wortes kombiniert. Wir wenden diesen Ansatz auf multilinguale und multidomain NER an und zeigen, dass es State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse auf den CoNLL 2002 Spanish and Dutch und CoNLL 2003 German NER Datensätzen erzielt, wobei konsistent 1.5-2.3 Prozent über dem Stand der Technik erreicht werden, ohne sich auf irgendwelche Wörterbuchfunktionen zu verlassen. Zusätzlich zeigen wir Verbesserungen bei SemEval 2013 Aufgabe 9.1 DrugNER, die auf dem neuesten Stand der Technik Ergebnisse auf dem MedLine Datensatz und insgesamt die zweitbesten Ergebnisse (-1.3% vom Stand der Technik) erzielen. Wir etablieren auch einen neuen Benchmark für den I2B2 2010 Clinical NER Datensatz mit 84.70 F-Score.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model praktis untuk pengenalan entitas bernama (NER) yang menggabungkan informasi kata dan tingkat karakter dengan representation tertentu belajar dari prefiks dan suffix dari kata. Kami menerapkan pendekatan ini untuk NER multibahasa dan multi-domain dan menunjukkan bahwa ia mencapai hasil terbaik pada CoNLL 2002 dataset Spanyol dan Belanda dan CoNLL 2003 Jerman NER, secara konsisten mencapai 1,5-2,3 persen atas keadaan seni tanpa bergantung pada karakteristik kamus apapun. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan peningkatan pada SemEval 2013 tugas 9.1 DrugNER, mencapai hasil terbaik di dataset MedLine dan hasil terbaik kedua secara keseluruhan (-1,3% dari hasil terbaik). Kami juga mendirikan benchmark baru pada dataset Klinik NER 2010 I2B2 dengan skor F 84,70.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model praktik për njohjen e emëruar të njësisë (NER) që kombinon informacionin e fjalës dhe nivelit të karakterit me një përfaqësim të përcaktuar të mësuar të parafusave dhe sufikseve të fjalës. Ne e aplikojmë këtë qasje ndaj NER shumëgjuhësore dhe shumëdomenesh dhe tregojmë se ajo arrin rezultatet më të larta të CoNLL 2002 të dhënave spanjolle dhe hollandeze dhe CoNLL 2003 të NER gjermane, duke arritur në mënyrë të vazhdueshme 1.5-2.3 përqind mbi gjendjen e teknologjisë pa mbështetur në asnjë karakteristik fjalor. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë përmirësim në detyrën SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, duke arritur rezultatet më të larta në dataset MedLine dhe rezultatet e dyta më të mira në përgjithësi (-1.3% nga state of the art). Ne gjithashtu vendosim një pikë të re të dhënash të I2B2 2010 Clinical NER me 84.70 pikë F.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mtindo wa uhalisia kwa jina la kutambua entity (NER) unaohamasisha taarifa za maneno na tabia kwa uwakilishi maalum wa vigogo na vigogo vya neno. Tunatumia mbinu hii kwenye NEW ya lugha mbalimbali na zaidi ya lugha na kuonyesha kwamba utafanikiwa hali ya matokeo ya sanaa kwenye seti za data za Kihispania na Uholanzi 2002 na CoNLL 2003 za Ujerumani, ikifikia asilimia 1.5-2.3 zaidi ya hali ya sanaa bila kutegemea tamko lolote la lugha. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha maendeleo katika kazi ya SemEval 2013 ya Dwaraka 9.1, kupata hali ya matokeo ya sanaa kwenye seti ya taarifa za MedLine na matokeo ya pili bora kabisa kwa ujumla (-1.3% kutoka kwenye hali ya sanaa). We also establish a new benchmark on the I2B2 2010 Clinical NER dataset with 84.70 F-score.', 'tr': "Biz Ady Entity Tanamak (NER) üçin bir praktik nusgasyny teklif edip, sözleriň we karakterleriň derejesini belli öwrenip, prefikslariň we yalğamalaryň birleştirilýän bir nusgasyny teklif edip görýäris. Biz bu ýalaýyşy birnäçe dilli we köp-domeny NER'a uygulapdyk we munuň 2002-nji ýylyň, espanyol we holandiýa we CoNLL 2003-nji ýylyň sanat düzümleriniň durumynda bolup başarmaýandygyny görkez. Hem biz SemEval 2013 zady 9.1 DrugNER we MedLine veri setindeki ýagtylygynyň durumyny ýetişdirýäris we ikinji iň gowy netijeleri hem (-1.3% sungatyň durumyndan). We also established a new benchmark on the I2B2 2010 Clinical NER dataset with 84.70 F-score.", 'am': 'የቃላት እና የጽሑፍ አካላት መረጃን በተለየ የፊርፊክሎችን እና የቃላትን መግለጫ እና መግለጫ በተማረ መልዕክቶች እና መግለጫ የሚያስፈልገውን ምሳሌ እናሳስባታለን፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓት በብዙ ቋንቋ እና በብዙ ዶሜইন NER እና በ2002 ስፓኒሽ እና ዳርክ እና ኮንጆን 2003 የጀርመን ኔር ዳታተሮች ላይ የጥናት ውጤት እንዲደርስ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የሜድLine ዳታተር ውጤቶች እና ሁለተኛው የበለጠ ውጤቶች በሙሉ የሳምEval 2013 ስራ 9.1 በመቶ አርእስት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በI2B2 2010 የClinical NER dataset ላይ አዲስ benchmark እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n praktiese model vir genaamde entiteit herkening (NER) wat word en karaktervlak inligting kombinieer met 'n spesifieke geleerde verteenwoording van die voorafikse en vervolging van die woord. Ons wend hierdie toegang tot multitaalske en multidomein NER en wys dat dit toestand van die kuns resultate op die CoNLL 2002 Spaanse en Nederlandese en CoNLL 2003 Duitse NER datastelle bereik het, en dit bestaan 1.5-2.3 persent oor die staat van die kuns sonder om op enige woordeboekfunksies te vertrou. In addition, we show improvement on SemEval 2013 task 9.1 DrugNER, aching state of the art results on the MedLine dataset and the second best results overall (-1.3% from state of the art). Ons stel ook 'n nuwe benchmark op die I2B2 2010 kliniese NER-datastel met 84.70 F-telling.", 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պրակտիկ մոդել անվանումների ճանաչելու համար, որը համադրում է բառի և բնավորության մակարդակի տեղեկատվությունը բառի և բնավորության մակարդակի հետ բառի նախադասությունների և բառի նախադասությունների կոնկրետ սովորված ներկայ Մենք կիրառում ենք այս մոտեցումը բազմալեզվով և բազմաբնույթներով ՆԵՌ-ի դեպքում և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն հասնում է ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքների 2002-ի Իսպաներեն, հոլանդացի և 2003-ի Գերմանացի ՆԵՌ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք մշտապես հասնում են 1,5-2,3 տոկոսին արվեստի դեպքում Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս զարգացումը 2013-ի "Սեմեվալ" 9.1 "Թմրադեղեր" խնդրի համար, որի արդյունքում ստանում ենք ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքները "Մեդլայնի" տվյալների համակարգում և երկրորդ լավագույն արդյունքները ընդհանուր առմամբ (-1. Մենք նաև ստեղծում ենք նոր համեմատական նպատակ 2010 թվականի I2B2 Կլինիկական ՆԵՌ տվյալների համակարգի վրա 84.70 ֆ-գնահատականով:', 'bs': 'Predlažemo praktični model priznanja entiteta (NER) koji kombinira informacije o riječi i nivou karaktera sa specifičnim naučenim predstavljanjem prefiksa i sufiksa riječi. Primjenjujemo ovaj pristup multijezičkom i multidomenom NER-u i pokazujemo da postigne stanje rezultata umjetnosti na španjolskim i holandskim i CoNLL-ovim podacima CoNLL 2002. godine i njemačkim NER-ovim podacima CoNLL 2003, koji je stalno postigao 1,5-2,3 posto iznad stanja umjetnosti bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve karakteristike rečnika. Osim toga, pokazujemo poboljšanje zadatka 9.1 DrugNER za semiEval 2013, ostvarivši stanje rezultata umjetnosti na setu podataka MedLine i drugi najbolji rezultat ukupno (-1.3% od stanja umjetnosti). Također smo uspostavili novu kritiku o I2B2 2010 Kliničkom kompletu NER podataka s 84,70 F rezultata.', 'az': 'Biz sözü və karakter-seviyyəti məlumatlarını özlərinə öyrənən prefikslərin və sözün təsirlərini birləşdirən adlı entitə tanıması üçün praktik modeli təklif edirik. Biz bu metodları çoxlu dil və çoxlu domani NER-ə uyğun edirik və onun 2002-ci CoNLL İspanyolu, Holandi və CoNLL 2003-ci Alman NER veri qutusu ilə müəyyən etdiyi sanatın halına 1.5-2.3%-ini heç bir sözlük mövcuddur. Üstəlik, biz semiEval 2013 işi 9.1 DrugNER ilə yaxşılıqlarını göstəririk, MedLine veri qutusu ilə sanat sonuçlarını və ikinci ən yaxşı sonuçlarını təsbit edirik (-1.3% sanatın eyaletindən). Biz həmçinin I2B2 2010 kliniki NER verilənləri 84.70 F-score ilə yeni bir benchmark qurduq.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যা শব্দ এবং অক্ষর-স্তর তথ্য সংযুক্ত করে শব্দ এবং অক্ষরের তথ্যের সাথে একটি নির্দিষ্ট প্রিফিক্ আমরা মাল্টিভাষা এবং বহুভাষী ডোমেইন নেটরের কাছে এই পদক্ষেপ প প্রয়োগ করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে কোন অভিধানের বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভর করা ছাড়া এটি কোন কোন স্প্যানিশ এবং ডাচ এবং কোনাল ২০০৩ জার্মানী নেটার এছাড়াও, আমরা সেমভাল ২০১৩ কাজের ৯. ১ মাদকেনার ব্যাপারে উন্নতি প্রদর্শন করি, মেডলাইনের ডাটাসেটে শিল্পের ফলাফল পাওয়া যাচ্ছে এবং দ্বিতীয় সেরা ফলাফল সার আমরা আই২বি২ ২০১০ সালের ক্লিনিক্যাল নেরার ডাটাসেটে একটি নতুন বেনম্যার্ক প্রতিষ্ঠান করেছি যার মাধ্যমে ৮৪.', 'ca': "Proposem un model pràctic per al reconeixement de l'entitat anomenada (NER) que combina la informació de paraula i nivell de caràcter amb una representació aprendida específica dels prefixes i sufixes de la paraula. Aplicam aquest enfocament a NER multillengües i multidominis i demostrem que aconsegueix els resultats més avançats dels conjunts de dades NER alemans CoNLL 2002 espanyol, holandès i CoNLL 2003, aconseguint constantment 1,5-2,3% sobre l'estat de l'art sense confiar en cap característica diccionaria. A més, demostram millor en la tasca 9.1 DrugNER de SemEval 2013, aconseguint els resultats més avançats del conjunt de dades MedLine i el segon millor resultat en general (-1,3% d'última tasca). També vam establir un nou punt de referència en el conjunt de dades Clinical NER 2010 amb 84,70 puntuacions F.", 'fi': 'Ehdotamme käytännön mallia nimetylle entiteettitunnistukselle (NER), joka yhdistää sana- ja merkkitason tiedon erityiseen opittuun esitykseen sanan etuliitteistä ja liitteistä. Sovellamme tätä lähestymistapaa monikieliseen ja monikieliseen NER-aineistoon ja osoitamme, että se saavuttaa huipputason tulokset CoNLL 2002 espanjan ja hollannin sekä CoNLL 2003 saksan NER-aineistojen osalta, saavuttaen johdonmukaisesti 1,5-2,3 prosenttia nykytekniikan tasosta luottamatta mihinkään sanakirjan ominaisuuksiin. Lisäksi näytämme parannusta SemEval 2013 -tehtävään 9.1 DrugNER, saavuttaen viimeisimpiä tuloksia MedLine-aineistossa ja toiseksi parhaat tulokset kokonaisuudessaan (-1,3% nykytekniikasta). Perustamme myös uuden vertailuarvon I2B2 2010 Clinical NER -aineistoon 84,70 F-pisteellä.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme praktický model pro rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER), který kombinuje informace na úrovni slova a znaků se specifickou naučenou reprezentací prefixů a přípon slova. Tento přístup aplikujeme na vícejazyčný a multidoménový NER a ukazujeme, že dosahuje nejmodernějších výsledků na španělských a nizozemských datových sadách CoNLL 2002 a CoNLL 2003 německých NER datových sadách, důsledně dosahujících 1.5-2.3 procent nad stavem techniky bez spoléhání na jakékoli funkce slovníku. Kromě toho ukazujeme zlepšení úlohy SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, dosažení nejmodernějších výsledků na datové sadě MedLine a celkově druhých nejlepších výsledků (-1.3% od stavu techniky). Dále jsme stanovili nový benchmark pro datovou sadu I2B2 2010 Clinical NER s 84.70 F-skóre.', 'et': 'Pakume välja praktilise mudeli nimetatud olemi tunnustamiseks (NER), mis ühendab sõna- ja märgitasemel teabe konkreetse õppitud esitusega sõna eesliidete ja sufixide kohta. Me rakendame seda lähenemisviisi mitmekeelsele ja mitmedomeenilisele NER-ile ning näitame, et see saavutab CoNLL 2002 hispaania ja hollandi ning CoNLL 2003 saksa NER-i andmekogumite tipptasemel tulemusi, saavutades järjekindlalt 1,5–2,3 protsenti tehnika tasemest ilma sõnastiku funktsioonidele tuginemata. Lisaks näitame SemEval 2013 ülesande 9.1 DrugNER edusamme, saavutades MedLine andmekogumi tipptasemel tulemusi ja teise parima tulemuse üldiselt (-1,3% tehnika tasemest). Samuti kehtestame I2B2 2010 kliinilise NER andmekogumi uue võrdlusaluse 84,70 F-skooriga.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים מודל מעשי לזהות ישות בשם (NER) שמשולב מידע מילה ורמה אופי עם מייצג למדוע ספציפי של הקדמויות והספיקסים של המילה. אנו משתמשים בגישה זו למספר שפות ומספר שפות NER ומראים שהיא משיגה תוצאות מוקדמות במידע של CoNLL 2002 בספרדית וההולנדית וקונל 2003 בספרדית ומידע NER גרמנית, משיגה באופן קבוע 1.5-2.3 אחוזים מעל המצב האמנותי בלי לסמוך על שום תכונות מילון. בנוסף, אנו מראים שיפור במשימה של SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, להשיג תוצאות המיוחדות במידע MedLine והתוצאות הטובות השניים באופן כללי (-1.3% ממיוחד המיוחדים). אנחנו גם מקבלים רמז חדש על קבוצת נתונים של I2B2 2010 קלינית NER עם 84.70 F-נקודה.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo praktičen model za prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet (NER), ki združuje informacije na ravni besed in znakov s specifično učeno predstavitvijo predpon in pripon besede. Ta pristop uporabljamo pri večjezičnem in večdomenskem NER in dokazujemo, da dosega najsodobnejše rezultate na španskem in nizozemskem podatkovnem nizu CoNLL 2002 in CoNLL 2003 nemškem NER, dosledno dosega 1,5-2,3 odstotka nad najsodobnejšim, ne da bi se zanašal na nobene značilnosti slovarja. Poleg tega smo prikazali izboljšanje naloge SemEval 2013 9.1 DrugNER, doseganje najsodobnejših rezultatov na naboru podatkov MedLine in drugih najboljših rezultatov na splošno (-1,3% od najsodobnejših). Vzpostavili smo tudi novo referenčno vrednost za I2B2 2010 Clinical NER podatkovni niz z 84,70 F-score.', 'ha': "Tuna buɗe wani misali mai amfani da sunan ganin shaidar abun (NER) wanda ke haɗa maganar da zane-zane-zane da wani tsari da aka sanar da shi wani ƙayyade masu fassarar da takardar maganar. Munã amfani da wannan hanyor zuwa masu multi-lingui da multi-domin NER kuma Muke nuna cewa ta sami halin fassaran sananni a kan CoNLL 2002 Isbanish da Dushanki da CoNLL 2003 na Jarman NER da aka sami da shi, yana sãmun 1.5-2.3%, a kan halin sanar da kuma bã ya dõgara a kan wasu fassarar sarrafiya. Ina ƙaranci, za'a nũna improvement on aikin SemEal 2013 na 9.1 DougNER, da gaskata halin fassarar sanarni a kan dataset na MedLine da na ƙarshen mafi kyaun fassara a jumla (-1.3% daga state of the art). Mu sami wani bangon na I2B2 2010", 'jv': '@title:group We use this method to multilanguage and multi-domain NUR and show that it can be able to access the state of the arts output on the CoNLL 2002Spanish and German and CoNLL 2003 German NeR datasets, formly ageing 1.5-2.3 percent of the state of the arts with no refying on the anying word. Mungkin etik, kita ngomongko langkung urip lan task 9.1 Awakdhéwé éntuk nggawe bendhèwèk sing gawe nggawe ing I2B2 2011 Daftar sing klèni NeR karo perusahaan apara, karo', 'bo': 'We propose a practical model for named entity recognition (NER) that combines word and character-level information with a specific learned representation of the prefixes and suffixes of the word. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྣ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ན། འདི་དག་གིས་CoNLL 2002 ས་ཡིག་སྒྲུང་དང་ເນོས་ཡུལ་དང་CoNLL 2003 སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་སྟངས Moreover, we show improvement on SemEval 2013 task 9.1 DrugNER, achieving the art results on the MedLine dataset and the second best results overall (-1.3% from state of the art). We also established a new benchmark on the I2B2 2010 Clinical NER dataset with 84.70 F-score.'}
{'en': 'Hypothesis Only Baselines in Natural Language Inference', 'ar': 'الفرضية فقط خطوط الأساس في استدلال اللغة الطبيعية', 'pt': 'Hipóteses Somente Linhas de Base na Inferência de Linguagem Natural', 'fr': "Baselines d'hypothèse uniquement dans l'inférence en langage naturel", 'es': 'Solo líneas de base de hipótesis en la inferencia del lenguaje natural', 'ja': '自然言語推論における仮説のみのベースライン', 'zh': '自然语言推理中仅假基线', 'hi': 'परिकल्पना प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान में केवल आधार रेखाएं', 'ru': 'Гипотеза Только исходные данные в выводе естественного языка', 'ga': 'Bunlínte Hipitéis amháin sa Tátal Teanga Nádúrtha', 'ka': 'ჰიპოტესი მხოლოდ საბაზო ხაზები ნაირადი ენის ინფერენციაში', 'el': 'Υπόθεση Μόνο Βασικές Γραμμές στο Συμπέρασμα Φυσικής Γλώσσας', 'kk': 'Тек негізгі тілдердің негізгі сызықтары', 'hu': 'Hipotézis Csak kiindulási értékek a természetes nyelvi inferenciában', 'ms': 'Hypothesis Only Baselines in Natural Language Inference', 'it': "Ipotesi Solo le linee di base nell'inferenza del linguaggio naturale", 'lt': 'Tik pradinės hipotezės gamtinės kalbos infekcijos atveju', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ മുന്നില്\u200d മാത്രം ഹൈപ്പോത്തെസിസ്', 'mn': 'Хипотез зөвхөн байгалийн хэл хамааралтай суурь шугам', 'no': 'Berre grunnlinjer i naturspråk', 'pl': 'Hipoteza Tylko podstawy w wnioskach języka naturalnego', 'mk': 'Хипотеза само основни линии во природната инференција на јазик', 'ro': 'Ipoteză Numai valorile inițiale în inferența limbajului natural', 'sr': 'Hipoteza samo osnovne linije u prirodnom jeziku', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව අවශ්\u200dය විතරයි හායිපෝටිස් විතරයි.', 'mt': 'Ipotesi Linji Bażi biss fl-Inferenza tal-Lingwa Naturali', 'so': 'Isticmaalka afka asalka ah oo kaliya', 'sv': 'Hypotes Endast baslinjer i naturligt språk inferens', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழியின் முன்னேற்றம்', 'ur': 'ہیپیٹیس صرف طبیعی زبان انفارنس میں بنسس لین', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chỉ căn bản về ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'bg': 'Хипотеза Само базови линии в естествените езикови изводи', 'da': 'Hypotese Kun Baselines i Natural Language Inference', 'hr': 'Hipoteza samo osnovne linije u prirodnom jeziku', 'nl': 'Hypothese Alleen Baselines in Natural Language Inference', 'de': 'Hypothese Nur Baselines in Natural Language Inference', 'id': 'Hypothesis Only Baselines in Natural Language Inference', 'ko': '자연 언어 추리 중의 순수한 가설 기선', 'fa': 'تنها خطوط بنیادی در تفاوت زبان طبیعی', 'sw': 'Ukosoaji wa mimea pekee katika Udhibiti wa lugha ya asili', 'tr': 'Tibiýal Dillerde Diňe Basit Hatlar', 'af': 'Hypotesis Slegs Basisline in Natuurlike Taal Inferensie', 'sq': 'Hypothesis Only Baselines in Natural Language Inference', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Hypotesis Sadece t…Щbi…Щtli Dil Inferencesi', 'hy': 'Հիպոթեզը միայն հիմնական գծերը բնական լեզվի ինֆերենսիայում', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষার প্রতিরোধে শুধুমাত্র হাইপটেসিস', 'bs': 'Hipoteza samo osnovne linije prirodnog jezika', 'ca': 'Hypothesis Only Baselines in Natural Language Inference', 'cs': 'Hypotéza Pouze základní linie v inferenci přirozeného jazyka', 'et': 'Hüpotees Ainult algtasemed loodusliku keele järelduste puhul', 'fi': 'Hypoteesi Vain lähtökohdat luonnollisen kielen päättelyssä', 'jv': 'Type', 'sk': 'Hipoteza samo izhodiščne vrednosti pri sklepanju naravnega jezika', 'he': 'היפותזיה בסיסיות בלבד בתנועה לשפה טבעית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྨས་གཞུང་ལ་རང་བཞིན་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་ལྷག་པར་ཁོ་ན་'}
{'en': 'We propose a hypothesis only baseline for diagnosing Natural Language Inference (NLI). Especially when an NLI dataset assumes inference is occurring based purely on the relationship between a context and a hypothesis, it follows that assessing entailment relations while ignoring the provided context is a degenerate solution. Yet, through experiments on 10 distinct NLI datasets, we find that this approach, which we refer to as a hypothesis-only model, is able to significantly outperform a majority-class baseline across a number of NLI datasets. Our analysis suggests that statistical irregularities may allow a model to perform NLI in some datasets beyond what should be achievable without access to the context.', 'ar': 'نحن نقترح فرضية أساسية فقط لتشخيص استدلال اللغة الطبيعية (NLI). خاصة عندما تفترض مجموعة بيانات NLI حدوث الاستدلال بناءً على العلاقة بين السياق والفرضية تمامًا ، فإن ذلك يترتب على ذلك أن تقييم علاقات الاستنتاج مع تجاهل السياق المقدم هو حل منحط. ومع ذلك ، من خلال التجارب على 10 مجموعات بيانات NLI متميزة ، وجدنا أن هذا النهج ، الذي نشير إليه كنموذج فرضية فقط ، قادر على التفوق بشكل كبير على خط الأساس لفئة الأغلبية عبر عدد من مجموعات بيانات NLI. يشير تحليلنا إلى أن المخالفات الإحصائية قد تسمح لنموذج بأداء NLI في بعض مجموعات البيانات بما يتجاوز ما ينبغي تحقيقه دون الوصول إلى السياق.', 'es': 'Proponemos una hipótesis de base solo para el diagnóstico de la Inferencia del Lenguaje Natural (NLI). Especialmente cuando un conjunto de datos NLI supone que la inferencia se produce basándose únicamente en la relación entre un contexto y una hipótesis, se deduce que evaluar las relaciones de implicación mientras se ignora el contexto proporcionado es una solución degenerada. Sin embargo, a través de experimentos en 10 conjuntos de datos distintos de NLI, encontramos que este enfoque, al que nos referimos como modelo solo de hipótesis, es capaz de superar significativamente a una línea de base de clase mayoritaria en varios conjuntos de datos de NLI. Nuestro análisis sugiere que las irregularidades estadísticas pueden permitir que un modelo realice NLI en algunos conjuntos de datos más allá de lo que debería ser alcanzable sin acceso al contexto.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma hipótese apenas de base para o diagnóstico de Inferência de Linguagem Natural (NLI). Especialmente quando um conjunto de dados NLI assume que a inferência está ocorrendo com base puramente na relação entre um contexto e uma hipótese, segue-se que avaliar as relações de vinculação ignorando o contexto fornecido é uma solução degenerada. No entanto, por meio de experimentos em 10 conjuntos de dados NLI distintos, descobrimos que essa abordagem, que chamamos de modelo apenas de hipóteses, é capaz de superar significativamente uma linha de base de classe majoritária em vários conjuntos de dados NLI. Nossa análise sugere que irregularidades estatísticas podem permitir que um modelo execute NLI em alguns conjuntos de dados além do que deveria ser alcançável sem acesso ao contexto.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une base d'hypothèse uniquement pour diagnostiquer l'inférence du langage naturel (NLI). En particulier lorsqu'un ensemble de données NLI suppose que l'inférence se produit uniquement sur la base de la relation entre un contexte et une hypothèse, il s'ensuit que l'évaluation des relations d'implication tout en ignorant le contexte fourni est une solution dégénérée. Pourtant, grâce à des expériences sur 10 ensembles de données NLI distincts, nous avons constaté que cette approche, que nous appelons un modèle basé uniquement sur des hypothèses, est capable de surpasser de manière significative une base de classe majoritaire dans un certain nombre d'ensembles de données NLI. Notre analyse suggère que des irrégularités statistiques peuvent permettre à un modèle d'effectuer l'INL dans certains ensembles de données au-delà de ce qui devrait être réalisable sans accès au contexte.", 'zh': '发一诊自然语言理(NLI)设基线。 特当NLI数集设推理纯粹上下文盖假设之际,故忽上下文同时评估蕴涵是一退化之解决方案。 然10异NLI数集之实验,吾见其术(谓之假设模样)能于众NLI之数,显优于众类基线。 臣等之分析表明,计不规则性可许模形于某数集行NLI,超出无上下文之间。', 'ja': '自然言語推論（ NLI ）を診断するためのベースラインのみの仮説を提案します。特に、NLIデータセットが、推論が純粋に文脈と仮説との関係に基づいて発生していると仮定する場合、提供された文脈を無視して帰結関係を評価することは、退化的な解決策であることが従う。しかし、10個の異なるNLIデータセットの実験を通じて、私たちは、仮説のみのモデルと呼ぶこのアプローチが、いくつかのNLIデータセットにわたって多数派クラスのベースラインを大幅に上回ることができることを発見しました。私たちの分析では、統計的な不規則性により、モデルがコンテキストにアクセスせずに達成可能なものを超えて、いくつかのデータセットでNLIを実行できる可能性があることが示唆されています。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем только базовую гипотезу для диагностики вывода естественного языка (NLI). Особенно когда набор данных NLI предполагает, что вывод происходит исключительно на основе взаимосвязи между контекстом и гипотезой, из этого следует, что оценка отношений влечения при игнорировании предоставленного контекста является вырожденным решением. Тем не менее, экспериментируя с 10 отдельными наборами данных NLI, мы обнаружили, что этот подход, который мы называем моделью только гипотезы, способен значительно превосходить исходный уровень большинства классов в ряде наборов данных NLI. Наш анализ позволяет предположить, что статистические нарушения могут позволить модели выполнять NLI в некоторых наборах данных сверх того, что должно быть достижимо без доступа к контексту.', 'hi': 'हम प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान (एनएलआई) के निदान के लिए केवल आधार रेखा की परिकल्पना का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से जब एक एनएलआई डेटासेट मानता है कि अनुमान विशुद्ध रूप से एक संदर्भ और एक परिकल्पना के बीच संबंधों के आधार पर हो रहा है, तो यह इस प्रकार है कि प्रदान किए गए संदर्भ को अनदेखा करते हुए अनिवार्य संबंधों का आकलन करना एक पतित समाधान है। फिर भी, 10 अलग-अलग एनएलआई डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों के माध्यम से, हम पाते हैं कि यह दृष्टिकोण, जिसे हम एक परिकल्पना-केवल मॉडल के रूप में संदर्भित करते हैं, कई एनएलआई डेटासेट में बहुमत वर्ग की आधार रेखा को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाने में सक्षम है। हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि सांख्यिकीय अनियमितताएं एक मॉडल को कुछ डेटासेट में एनएलआई करने की अनुमति दे सकती हैं, जो संदर्भ तक पहुंच के बिना प्राप्त करने योग्य होनी चाहिए।', 'ga': 'Molaimid hipitéis ach bonnlíne chun Tátail Nádúrtha Teanga (NLI) a dhiagnóisiú. Go háirithe nuair a ghlacann tacar sonraí de chuid LNÉ leis go bhfuil tátal ag tarlú bunaithe ar an ngaol idir comhthéacs agus hipitéis amháin, leanann sé gur réiteach meathlaithe é measúnú a dhéanamh ar chaidreamh idirghabhála agus neamhaird a dhéanamh ar an gcomhthéacs a chuirtear ar fáil. Mar sin féin, trí thurgnaimh ar 10 dtacar sonraí ar leith de chuid LNÉ, feicimid go bhfuil an cur chuige seo, a bhfuilimid ag tagairt dó mar mhúnla hipitéise-amháin, in ann dul i bhfeidhm go mór ar bhunlíne rang tromlaigh thar roinnt tacar sonraí de chuid LNÉ. Tugann ár n-anailís le fios go bhféadfadh neamhrialtachtaí staitistiúla ligean do shamhail LNÉ a fheidhmiú i roinnt tacair sonraí thar an méid ba cheart a bheith indéanta gan rochtain ar an gcomhthéacs.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια υπόθεση μόνο βάσης για τη διάγνωση της Συμπερασμάτων Φυσικής Γλώσσας (ΝΛΙ). Ειδικά όταν ένα σύνολο δεδομένων υποθέτει ότι η εξαγωγή συμπερασμάτων πραγματοποιείται αποκλειστικά με βάση τη σχέση μεταξύ ενός πλαισίου και μιας υπόθεσης, προκύπτει ότι η αξιολόγηση των σχέσεων συνεπαγόμενων συνεπειών αγνοώντας το παρεχόμενο πλαίσιο είναι μια εκφυλισμένη λύση. Ωστόσο, μέσα από πειράματα σε δέκα διακριτά σύνολα δεδομένων, διαπιστώνουμε ότι αυτή η προσέγγιση, που αναφερόμαστε ως μοντέλο μόνο για υποθέσεις, είναι σε θέση να ξεπεράσει σημαντικά μια γραμμή βάσης πλειοψηφίας σε έναν αριθμό συνόλων δεδομένων. Η ανάλυσή μας δείχνει ότι οι στατιστικές παρατυπίες μπορεί να επιτρέψουν σε ένα μοντέλο να εκτελέσει NLI σε ορισμένα σύνολα δεδομένων πέρα από αυτό που θα έπρεπε να είναι εφικτό χωρίς πρόσβαση στο πλαίσιο.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvi fertőzés (NLI) diagnosztizálására kizárólag hipotézist javasolunk. Különösen akkor, amikor egy NLI adatkészlet feltételezi, hogy a következtetés kizárólag a kontextus és a hipotézis közötti kapcsolaton alapul, az ebből következik, hogy a vonatkozási kapcsolatok értékelése a megadott kontextus figyelmen kívül hagyása mellett degenerált megoldás. Mégis 10 különböző NLI adatkészleten végzett kísérletek révén úgy találjuk, hogy ez a megközelítés, amelyet csak hipotézis modellnek nevezünk, jelentősen felülmúlja a többségi osztályú alapkészletet számos NLI adatkészletben. Elemzésünk azt sugallja, hogy a statisztikai szabálytalanságok lehetővé teszik egy modell számára, hogy néhány adatkészletben meghaladja a környezethez való hozzáférés nélkül elérhető mértéket.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მხოლოდ ჰიპოტეზეზია მხოლოდ ფესტური ხაზი, რომელიც დიაგონგიზაციას მივიღებთ ჩემი ენერგიის ინფერენცია (NLI). განსაკუთრებით როდესაც NLI მონაცემების კონტექსტის შესახებ, რომ ინფრენცია მოხდება მხოლოდ კონტექსტის და ჰიპოტესტის შესახებ, ეს მოხდება, რომ შესახებ შესახებ შესახებ შესახებ, როდესაც განვი თუმცა, 10 განსაკუთრებული NLI მონაცემების განსაკუთრებული მონაცემების გამოყენებით, ჩვენ ვხედავთ, რომ ეს პროგრამა, რომელიც ჩვენ მხოლოდ ჰიპოტეზის მხოლოდ მოდელს, შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ უფრო მეტი ჩვენი ანალიზია იგივეა, რომ სტატისტიკური განსხვავებები შეიძლება მოდელს NLI გავაკეთოთ რამდენიმე მონაცემების კონტექსტში, რაც უნდა იყოს შესაძლებელი კონტექ', 'kk': 'Біз тек табиғи тіл инференциясын диагностикациялау үшін негізгі гипотезаны таңдаймыз. Әсіресе, NLI деректер қорының инфициенті контекст мен гипотеза арасындағы қатынастың негізінде болады деп ойлағанда, ол келтірілген контексті елемегенде қатынастың қатынасын оқу деген деген шешімі. Бірақ 10 түрлі NLI деректер қорларында тәжірибелер арқылы, біз тек гипотеза үлгісі деп аталатын, NLI деректер қорларының бірнеше ретінде көпшілікті классының негізгі негізгі жолын көмектесуге болады. Біздің анализиямыз статистикалық жарамсыздықтар бағдарламасына қатынау керек деректер қорларында NLI үлгісін орындауға мүмкіндік береді.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме хипотеза само за дијагнозирање на природната инференција на јазикот (НЛИ). Особено кога наборот на податоци на НЛИ претпоставува дека се случува инференција врз основа на односот помеѓу контекст и хипотеза, следи дека проценката на односите со вмешаност, истовремено игнорирајќи го обезбедениот контекст, е дегенерирано решение. Сепак, преку експерименти на 10 различни податоци на НЛИ, откриваме дека овој пристап, кој го нарекуваме само како модел со хипотеза, е во можност значително да го надмине базата на мнозинска класа во голем број податоци на НЛИ. Нашата анализа покажува дека статистичките нерегуларности може да овозможат моделот да изврши НЛИ во некои податоци надвор од она што треба да се постигне без пристап до контекстот.', 'it': "Proponiamo un'ipotesi di base solo per la diagnosi dell'inferenza del linguaggio naturale (NLI). Soprattutto quando un set di dati NLI presume che l'inferenza si stia verificando esclusivamente sulla relazione tra un contesto e un'ipotesi, ne consegue che valutare le relazioni di implicazione ignorando il contesto fornito è una soluzione degenerata. Tuttavia, attraverso esperimenti su 10 insiemi di dati NLI distinti, scopriamo che questo approccio, che ci riferiamo come un modello basato solo su ipotesi, è in grado di superare significativamente una base di base di classe maggioritaria su un certo numero di insiemi di dati NLI. La nostra analisi suggerisce che irregolarità statistiche possono consentire a un modello di eseguire NLI in alcuni set di dati al di là di quanto dovrebbe essere realizzabile senza accesso al contesto.", 'lt': 'Siūlome tik bazinę hipotezę gamtinės kalbos infekcijos (NLI) diagnozavimui. Ypač, kai NLI duomenų rinkinys daro išvadą, pagrįstą vien konteksto ir hipotezės santykiu, daroma išvada, kad susijusių santykių vertinimas ignoruojant pateiktą kontekstą yra degeneruotas sprendimas. Vis dėlto, atlikdami eksperimentus su 10 skirtingų NLI duomenų rinkinių, manome, kad šis metodas, kurį vadiname tik hipoteze modeliu, gali gerokai viršyti daugumos klasės bazinius duomenis daugelyje NLI duomenų rinkinių. Mūsų analizė rodo, kad statistiniai pažeidimai gali sudaryti galimybę modeliui atlikti NLI kai kuriuose duomenų rinkiniuose, viršijančiuose tai, kas turėtų būti pasiekta be galimybės susipažinti su aplinkybėmis.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu ipoteżi fil-linja bażi biss għad-dijanjosi tal-Inferenza tal-Lingwa Naturali (NLI). Speċjalment meta sett ta’ dejta NLI jassumi li qed isseħħ inferenza bbażata purament fuq ir-relazzjoni bejn kuntest u ipoteżi, jirriżulta li l-valutazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet ta’ involviment filwaqt li jiġi injorat il-kuntest ipprovdut hija soluzzjoni deġenerata. Madankollu, permezz ta’ esperimenti fuq 10 settijiet ta’ dejta distinti tal-NLI, instabu li dan l-approċċ, li nirreferu għalih bħala mudell ipoteżiku biss, jista’ jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-linja bażi tal-klassi maġġoritarja f’għadd ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta tal-NLI. Our analysis suggests that statistical irregularities may allow a model to perform NLI in some datasets beyond what should be achievable without access to the context.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan hipotesis hanya asas untuk diagnosis Inferensi Bahasa Alami (NLI). Especially when an NLI dataset assumes inference is occurring based purely on the relationship between a context and a hypothesis, it follows that assessing entailment relations while ignoring the provided context is a degenerate solution.  Namun, melalui eksperimen pada 10 set data NLI yang berbeza, kita mendapati bahawa pendekatan ini, yang kita sebut sebagai model hipotesis-sahaja, mampu melampaui batas dasar kelas-kebanyakan dalam sejumlah set data NLI. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa kegagalan statistik mungkin membenarkan model untuk melaksanakan NLI dalam beberapa set data melampaui apa yang patut dicapai tanpa akses ke konteks.', 'mn': 'Бид зөвхөн байгалийн хэл инференцийг оношлох суурь шугам гэж үзүүлдэг. Ялангуяа NLI өгөгдлийн сангууд халдвар нь нөхцөл байдал болон гиптезийн хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын холбоотой байдаг гэдгийг ойлгоход үүнийг хариултын холбоотой холбоотой байдаг. Гэвч, 10 ялгаатай NLI өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтаар бид энэ арга нь зөвхөн гиптезийн загвар гэж нэрлэдэг, NLI өгөгдлийн сангийн олон хэсэгт ихэнх ангийн суурь шугам дээр суурь шугам гаргаж чадах боломжтой болно. Бидний шинжилгээнд статистикийн буруу буруу байдал нөхцөлд хүрэхгүй юу гарах ёстой вэ гэдгээс гадна зарим өгөгдлийн санд NLI-г үйлдвэрлэхэд загвар болох юм.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår berre ein grunnlinje for diagnostisering av naturspråk-inferens (NLI). Spesielt når ein NLI- datasett antar at infeksjonen er basert bare på forholdet mellom ein kontekst og ein hipotese, følgjer det at å vurdere forholdet mellom å ignorera den oppgjevne konteksten er ein degenerert løysing. Men, gjennom eksperimenter på 10 ulike NLI-datasett, finn vi at denne tilnærminga, som vi refererer til som eit hypotesisk bare modell, er i stand til å utføre mykje ein grunnlinje over fleire NLI-datasett. Analysen vårt tyder på at statistiske ulikheter kan tillata eit modell å utføra NLI i noen datasett enn kva som skal vera tilgjengeleg utan tilgang til konteksten.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy hipotezę wyłącznie podstawową do diagnozowania wniosków języka naturalnego (NLI). Szczególnie jeśli zbiór danych NLI zakłada, że wniosek występuje wyłącznie w oparciu o relację między kontekstem a hipotezą, wynika z tego, że ocena relacji implikacyjnych przy jednoczesnym ignorowaniu dostarczonego kontekstu jest rozwiązaniem zdegenerowanym. Jednak poprzez eksperymenty na dziesięciu odrębnych zbiorach danych NLI, okazujemy się, że to podejście, które nazywamy modelem tylko hipotezami, jest w stanie znacznie przewyższyć bazę bazową klasy większości w wielu zbiorach danych NLI. Nasza analiza sugeruje, że nieprawidłowości statystyczne mogą pozwolić modelowi na wykonanie NLI w niektórych zbiorach danych poza to, co powinno być osiągalne bez dostępu do kontekstu.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പരിഗണിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ബെസ്റ്റലൈന്\u200d മാത്രമാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഹൈപ്പിത്യസിസ് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഒരു NLI ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് വിചാരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പരിഭ്രമത്തിന്റെയും ഒരു ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റിസിന്റെയും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധം മാത്രമാണ് സംഭവിക്കുന്നത എന്നിട്ടും 10 വ്യത്യസ്തമായ NLI ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലൂടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളിലൂടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, ഈ നടപടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹൈപ്പിറ്റസിസ് മോഡല്\u200d എന്ന് വിളിക്കുന്നു, ന നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d പരിസ്ഥിതികതയുടെ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധമില്ലാത്ത ചില ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d', 'sr': 'Predlažemo hipotezu samo početnu liniju za dijagnozu infekcije prirodnog jezika (NLI). Posebno kada se NLI podaci pretpostavlja da se infekcija pojavljuje na temelju odnosa između konteksta i hipoteze, slijedi da procjena odnosa o želji dok ignorišemo obezbeđeni kontekst je degeneracijsko rješenje. Međutim, kroz eksperimente na 10 različitih NLI podataka, smatramo da je taj pristup, koji se smatramo samo hipotezom modelom, u stanju značajno nadmašiti početnu liniju većine klase preko broja NLI podataka. Naša analiza ukazuje na to da statističke nepravilnosti mogu omogućiti model da izvrši NLI u nekim podacima izvan onoga što bi trebalo biti dostupno bez pristupa kontekstu.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව අනුවිශ්නයක් විතරයි. විශේෂයෙන්ම NLI දත්ත සම්බන්ධයක් හිතන්නේ පරීක්ෂණය සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණය සහ සම්බන්ධයක් අතර සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයෙ නමුත්, විශේෂ NLI දත්ත සෙට් 10 විදියට පරීක්ෂණාවක් නිසා, අපි හොයාගන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය, අපි හිතන්නේ අනුවිශේෂණය විතරයි, ප්\u200dරවේශනය විතරය අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක නිර්මාණයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට NLI නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa tijaatarka oo kaliya si aan u ogaano dhibaatada afka asalka ah (NLI). Si gaar ah marka danbiyada NLI uu u maleeyo inay jiraan oo kali ah ku saleysan xiriirka isku xiriirka xaalada iyo fikiriska, waxaa suurtagal in qiimeynaya xiriirka aqoonta, marka uu ka tago xadhka la siiyo waa xal degdeg ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, baaritaanka ku qoran 10 kooxaha danbiyada ee NLI oo kala duduwan, waxaynu helnaa in qaabkan aan u jeedno model kaliya ee hypothesis, uu si weyn u sameyn karo fasalka kooxaha tirada badan oo ka soo baxa kooban danbiyada NLI. Analyadaada waxaa ka muuqanaya in takhasusyada takhasuska ah uu sameyn karo model NLI qaarkood oo ka sokow waxa lagu heli karo iyadoon la helin tartanka.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک فرضی کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں صرف طبیعی زبان انفارنس (NLI) کے لئے۔ مخصوصاً جب ایک NLI ڈاٹ سٹ نے سمجھ لیا ہے کہ نازل کی وجہ صرف ایک کنٹسٹ اور ایک فرضی کے درمیان رابطہ پر مبتلا ہوتی ہے، اس کا اتباع کرتا ہے کہ اپنا ارتباط کا ارتباط کا ارتباط کیا گیا ہے جبکہ وضع کی کنٹسٹ کو نازل کرنا لیکن، 10 مختلف NLI ڈاٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کے ذریعہ، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ یہ طریقہ، جسے ہم صرف hypothesis-only موڈل کے ذریعہ سمجھتے ہیں، بہت سی کلاس بنسٹ لین کو NLI ڈاٹ سٹ کے کئی تعدادوں میں اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں. ہماری تحلیل کی توصیح کرتا ہے کہ ایسٹیسٹی غیرقانونی ایک موڈل کو NLI کے کام کرنے کے لئے اجازت دے سکتی ہے اس کے بعد کہ اس سے زیادہ کچھ کام آئیں کہ اس کے کام آئیں بغیر اس کے.', 'ro': 'Propunem o ipoteză de bază pentru diagnosticarea infecției limbajului natural (NLI). Mai ales atunci când un set de date NLI presupune că există inferență bazată exclusiv pe relația dintre un context și o ipoteză, rezultă că evaluarea relațiilor de implicare în timp ce ignorăm contextul furnizat este o soluție degenerată. Cu toate acestea, prin experimente pe 10 seturi de date NLI distincte, descoperim că această abordare, la care ne referim ca un model numai ipoteze, este capabilă să depășească semnificativ o bază de bază de clasă majoritară într-un număr de seturi de date NLI. Analiza noastră sugerează că neregulile statistice pot permite unui model să efectueze NLI în anumite seturi de date dincolo de ceea ce ar trebui realizat fără acces la context.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en hypotes endast baslinje för diagnostisering av Natural Language Inference (NLI). Särskilt när en NLI-datamängd antar att slutsatser sker enbart baserat på förhållandet mellan ett sammanhang och en hypotes, följer det att bedömningen av involveringsrelationer samtidigt som man ignorerar det givna sammanhanget är en degenererad lösning. Ändå, genom experiment på 10 olika NLI-datauppsättningar, finner vi att detta tillvägagångssätt, som vi hänvisar till som en hypotes-modell, kan avsevärt överträffa en majoritetsklass baslinje över ett antal NLI-datauppsättningar. Vår analys tyder på att statistiska oegentligheter kan göra det möjligt för en modell att utföra NLI i vissa datauppsättningar utöver vad som borde vara möjligt utan tillgång till sammanhanget.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி புரட்சியை கண்டறிவதற்கு மட்டும் ஒரு குழப்பம் மட்டுமே நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். Name ஆனால், 10 வித்தியாசமான NLI தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் மூலம், நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் இந்த முறைமையை ஒரு ஹைப்டியஸ் மட்டும் மாதிரி என்று குறிக்கிறது, நா எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி புள்ளிவிவரங்கள் என்று நினைக்கிறது சில தரவுத்தளத்திற்கு மேல் என்ன அடைய வேண்டும் என்பதை அனுமதிக்க ஒரு மாதிரி', 'uz': "Biz oddiy tilni aniqlash (NLI) uchun faqatgina hypothesis tartibi qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Lekin 10 bo'lgan NLI maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'rganish orqali biz buni o'ylaymiz, bu usulni faqat hypothesis modeli deb hisoblash mumkin, biz bir necha NLI maʼlumotlar tarkibida ko'p darajadagi bir necha darajada baza satrni bajaradi. Analytikizni anglatadi, statistik tartibiqlarini bir necha maʼlumotlar sahifadan NLI bajarishga imkoniyatlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một giả thuyết chỉ cơ bản để chẩn đoán liên hệ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLI). Đặc biệt khi một bộ dữ liệu NLI giả sử ngụ ý rằng ngụ ý tồn tại chỉ dựa trên mối quan hệ giữa ngữ cảnh và một giả thuyết, có nghĩa là đánh giá mối quan hệ giao tiếp, mặc dù lờ bối cảnh được cung cấp là một giải pháp suy đồi. Tuy nhiên, bằng các thí nghiệm trên 10s khác nhau các nhà dữ liệu NLI, chúng tôi thấy rằng phương pháp này, mà chúng tôi gọi là mô hình duy nhất giả thuyết, có khả năng vượt trội một cơ sở cơ sở cơ bản hạng nhất trên một số nhà dữ liệu NLI. Phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy các sai sót thống kê có thể cho phép mô hình thực hiện NLI trong một số bộ dữ liệu vượt xa những gì có thể thực hiện mà không được sử dụng trong ngữ cảnh.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo hipotezu samo početnu liniju za dijagnosticiju infekcije prirodnog jezika (NLI). Posebno kada se NLI podaci pretpostavlja da se infekcija pojavljuje temeljno na odnosu između konteksta i hipoteze, sljedeće se da procjena odnosa o namještanju dok ignoriraju predviđeni kontekst je degeneracija rješenja. Međutim, kroz eksperimente na 10 različitih NLI podataka, smatramo da je taj pristup, koji se smatramo samo hipotezom modelom, u stanju značajno nadmašiti početnu liniju većine klase u broju NLI podataka. Naša analiza ukazuje na to da statističke nepravilnosti mogu omogućiti model izvršavanja NLI u nekim podacima izvan onoga što bi trebalo biti dostupno bez pristupa kontekstu.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме хипотеза само базова база за диагностициране на естествени езикови изводи (НЛИ). Особено когато набор от данни предполага, че се извършва заключение въз основа чисто на връзката между контекст и хипотеза, от това следва, че оценката на свързаните отношения при пренебрегване на предоставения контекст е дегенерирано решение. Въпреки това, чрез експерименти върху 10 различни набора от данни от НЛИ, откриваме, че този подход, който наричаме модел само на хипотези, е в състояние значително да надмине базовата база на мнозинството от класа в редица набори от данни на НЛИ. Нашият анализ предполага, че статистическите нередности могат да позволят на модел да извършва НЛИ в някои набори от данни извън това, което би трябвало да бъде постижимо без достъп до контекста.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine Hypothesenbasis für die Diagnose von Natural Language Inference (NLI) vor. Insbesondere wenn ein NLI-Datensatz davon ausgeht, dass Inferenz ausschließlich auf der Beziehung zwischen einem Kontext und einer Hypothese erfolgt, folgt daraus, dass die Beurteilung von Implikationsbeziehungen unter Ignorierung des bereitgestellten Kontextes eine degenerierte Lösung ist. Durch Experimente mit zehn verschiedenen NLI-Datensätzen stellen wir jedoch fest, dass dieser Ansatz, den wir als Hypothesen-Only-Modell bezeichnen, in der Lage ist, eine Mehrheitsklasse-Baseline über eine Reihe von NLI-Datensätzen signifikant zu übertreffen. Unsere Analyse legt nahe, dass statistische Unregelmäßigkeiten es einem Modell ermöglichen können, NLI in einigen Datensätzen durchzuführen, die über das hinausgehen, was ohne Zugriff auf den Kontext erreichbar sein sollte.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan hipotesis hanya dasar untuk mendiagnosis Inferensi Bahasa Alami (NLI). Terutama ketika sebuah set data NLI menganggap kesimpulan terjadi berdasarkan hanya hubungan antara konteks dan hipotesis, mengikuti bahwa penilaian hubungan entailment sementara mengabaikan konteks yang diberikan adalah solusi degenerat. Namun, melalui eksperimen pada 10 set data NLI yang berbeda, kami menemukan bahwa pendekatan ini, yang kami sebut sebagai model hipotesis-only, mampu melampaui batas dasar kelas-mayoritas dalam sejumlah set data NLI. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahwa ketidakregularitas statistik mungkin memungkinkan model untuk melakukan NLI dalam beberapa set data di luar apa yang seharusnya dicapai tanpa akses ke konteks.', 'ko': '우리는 자연 언어 추리 (NLI) 를 진단하는 데만 사용되는 가설 기선을 제시했다.특히 NLI 데이터 세트 가설 추리는 단순히 상하문과 가설 간의 관계를 바탕으로 할 때 제공된 상하문을 소홀히 하는 상황에서 내포된 관계를 평가하는 것이 퇴화된 해결 방안이라는 결론을 얻을 수 있다.그러나 10개의 서로 다른 NLI 데이터 집합에서의 실험을 통해 우리는 이러한 방법(가설모델만 부른다)이 많은 NLI 데이터 집합에서 다수의 기선보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.우리의 분석에 의하면 통계상의 불규칙성은 모델이 일부 데이터에서 NLI를 집중적으로 실행할 수 있는데 이것은 상하문에 접근하지 않는 상황에서 실현해야 할 범위를 넘어설 수 있다.', 'fa': 'ما فقط یک فرضیه اصلی برای تشخیص تفاوت زبان طبیعی (NLI) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. مخصوصا وقتی مجموعه داده\u200cهای NLI تصور می\u200cکند که آلودگی بر روی رابطه بین یک محیط و یک فرضیه اتفاق می\u200cافتد، این پیروی می\u200cکند که ارزیابی رابطه\u200cهای آلودگی در حال نادیده کردن محیط پیشنهاد یک راه حل نابودی است. با این حال، از طریق آزمایش\u200cهای ۱۰ مجموعه داده\u200cهای NLI متفاوت، پیدا می\u200cکنیم که این روش، که ما به عنوان یک مدل تنها فرضیه\u200cای می\u200cگوییم، قادر است بسیار زیادی از خط پایگاه\u200cهای بیشتر کلاس را در تعداد مجموعه داده\u200cهای NLI انجام دهد. تحلیل ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که غیرقانونی آمار ممکن است یک مدل اجازه دهد که NLI را در بعضی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cای فراتر از آنچه باید بدون دسترسی به محیط رسیده شود.', 'nl': 'We stellen een hypothese alleen baseline voor voor het diagnosticeren van Natural Language Inference (NLI). Vooral wanneer een NLI-dataset veronderstelt dat inferentie louter plaatsvindt op basis van de relatie tussen een context en een hypothese, volgt dat het beoordelen van implicatierelaties zonder de verstrekte context te negeren een gedegenereerde oplossing is. Echter, door experimenten met tien verschillende NLI datasets, ontdekken we dat deze benadering, die we verwijzen naar een hypothese-only model, in staat is om significant een meerderheidsklasse baseline over een aantal NLI datasets te overtreffen. Onze analyse suggereert dat statistische onregelmatigheden een model in staat kunnen stellen NLI uit te voeren in sommige datasets buiten wat haalbaar zou moeten zijn zonder toegang tot de context.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en hypotese kun baseline for diagnosticering af Natural Language Inference (NLI). Især når et NLI-datasæt antager, at konklusion forekommer udelukkende baseret på forholdet mellem en kontekst og en hypotese, følger det, at vurdering af involveringsrelationer, mens man ignorerer den givne kontekst, er en degenereret løsning. Men gennem eksperimenter på 10 forskellige NLI datasæt finder vi, at denne tilgang, som vi refererer til som en hypotese-only model, er i stand til betydeligt at overgå en flertalsklasse baseline på tværs af en række NLI datasæt. Vores analyse tyder på, at statistiske uregelmæssigheder kan gøre det muligt for en model at udføre NLI i nogle datasæt ud over, hvad der burde være muligt uden adgang til konteksten.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza nadharia ya nadharia ya msingi tu kwa ajili ya kutambua Kungiliwa na Lugha ya asili (NLI). Hasa pale kituo cha taarifa cha NLI kinadhani kuwa ugonjwa unatokea unatokana na mahusiano kati ya muktadha na nadharia, inafuata kwamba kutathmini mahusiano ya kisayansi wakati wakiacha mazingira yanayotolewa ni suluhisho la haraka. Hata hivyo, kwa kupitia majaribio ya seti 10 tofauti za NLI, tunagundua kuwa mbinu hii, ambayo tunamaanisha kuwa model ya nadharia pekee ya wanafikiri, inaweza kufanya mazingira ya darasa la watu wengi katika seti kadhaa za data za NLI. Uchambuzi wetu unapendekeza kuwa upinzani wa takwimu unaweza kuruhusu muundo wa kutekeleza NLI katika seti za data zaidi ya kile kinachopaswa kufikia bila kupatikana na muktadha huo.', 'tr': 'Biz tebigy dil Inferensiýasyny (NLI) dyaglamak üçin diňe temel çyzgyny teklip edip bilýäris. Özellikle NLI maglumat seti alçaklaryň bir kontekst we hypotezi arasyndaky baglaýyşynyň arasynda diňe däl bolandygyny düşünýän wagtlar, munyň ýagdaýyny ýok edip bolan baglaýyşyny barlamagyny boýun sürýär. Ýöne, 10 öň bellenen NLI veri setirlerinde örenmek üçin bu ýagdaýy tapýarys, bu ýagdaýy diňe hipotez-diňe bir nusga diýip kabul eden, NLI veri setirleriniň birnäçe köp synpdaky baseliniň üstüne çykyp biler. Biziň analýusymyz statistik irregulardan NLI köp datum düzümlerinde näme üçin barlap biljek bolmalydygyny düşünýär.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një hipotezë vetëm bazë për diagnozimin e Inferencës së Gjuhave Natyrore (NLI). Veçan ërisht kur një grup i të dhënave NLI merr parasysh se përfundimi po ndodh vetëm në bazë të marrëdhënieve midis një konteksti dhe një hipoteze, pason se vlerësimi i marrëdhënieve të përfshira ndërsa injoron kontekstin e ofruar është një zgjidhje e degeneruar. Megjithatë, nëpërmjet eksperimenteve në 10 grupe të dhënash të veçanta NLI, gjejmë se kjo qasje, që ne e referojmë si një model i vetëm hipotezës, është në gjendje të kalojë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme një bazë të klasës së shumicës në një numër të grupeve të dhënash NLI. Analiza jonë sugjeron se parregullsitë statistike mund të lejojnë një model të kryejë NLI në disa grupe të dhënash përtej asaj që duhet të arrihet pa akses në kontekst.', 'am': 'የባሕላዊ ቋንቋን መግለጫ ማግኘት ብቻ መቆጣጠርን እናስባለን፡፡ በተለይም የNLI ዳታ ሳንሱር በሥርዓት እና በhypothesis መካከል ግንኙነት በተደረገ ጊዜ የውይይት ግንኙነትን በማሳየት የሚችሉትን ግንኙነት እየራቀ ፈቃድ መፍትሄ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በ10 በተለየ የNLI ዳታተር ጽሑፎች ላይ በተፈተና፣ ይህንን ሥርዓት በቁጥር የኤንሊ ዳታተሮች ብዙዎችን የክፍለ ጥያቄ መደምደሚያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ Analysያችን የstatistical ግንኙነት በክፍለ ግንኙነት ሳይገኝ ከዳታተሮች በላይ የሚደረገውን የNLI ሞዴል እንዲፈቅድ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք հիպոթեզի միայն հիմքում բնական լեզվի ինֆերանսի ախտորոշելու համար: Հատկապես, երբ ՆԼԻ տվյալների համակարգը ենթադրում է, որ եզրակացությունը կատարվում է պարզապես կոնտեքստի և հիպոթեզի միջև կապի վրա, հետևում է, որ ներգրավված հարաբերությունների գնահատումը, չնայած տրված կոնտեքստին, դեգեներատ լուծում է: Այնուամենայնիվ, 10 տարբեր ՆԼԻ տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումների միջոցով մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ այս մոտեցումը, որը մենք անվանում ենք միայն հիպոթեզի մոդել, կարողանում է նշանակալիորեն գերազանցել ՆԼԻ տվյալների համակարգերի մեծամասնության հիմքեր Մեր վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ վիճակագրական անօրինակությունները կարող են թույլ տալ, որ մոդելը կատարի ՆԼԱ-ն որոշ տվյալների համակարգերում, որոնք ավելի շատ են քան այն, ինչ պետք է հասանելի լինել առանց հնարավորության հաս', 'bn': 'আমরা শুধুমাত্র স্বাভাবিক ভাষা ইনফারেন্স (এনলি) চিহ্নিত করার জন্য একটি হাইপিথিসেস প্রস্তাব করি। Especially when an NLI dataset assumes inference is occurring based purely on the relationship between a context and a hypothesis, it follows that assessing entailment relations while ignoring the provided context is a degenerate solution.  তবে ১০ টি বিভিন্ন এনলি ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা পাই যে এই পদ্ধতি আমরা হাইপিথিস-শুধুমাত্র মডেল হিসেবে চিহ্নিত করি সংখ্যাগরিষ্ঠ ক্লাসের বেসাইলা আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ পরামর্শ প্রদান করেছে যে পরিসংখ্যানের বৈধতা সম্ভবত কিছু ডাটাসেটের বাইরে এনলির মডেল প্রয়োগ করতে পারে যা প্রবেশ করা', 'ca': "Proposem una hipòtesi només basal per diagnosticar la Inferència de Llingua Natural (NLI). Especialment quan un conjunt de dades de l'INL suposa que la inferència està ocorrent basant-se purament en la relació entre un context i una hipòtesi, segona que la valoració de les relacions d'involucració mentre ignora el context proporcionat és una solució degenerada. Tot i així, a través d'experiments de 10 conjunts de dades distints de l'INN, descobrim que aquest enfocament, que anomenem model només hipòtesis, és capaç de superar significativament la base de classe majoritària d'un conjunt de dades de l'INN. Our analysis suggests that statistical irregularities may allow a model to perform NLI in some datasets beyond what should be achievable without access to the context.", 'az': "Biz t…ôbi…ôtli Dil Inference (NLI) diagnostikasńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn yalnńĪz t…ôbi…ôtli bir hipotezi t…ôklif edirik. √Ėzellikle NLI veril…ônl…ôrin qurńüusunda infeksiyonun m…ôlumat v…ô hipotezi arasńĪndakńĪ iliŇükisi t…ômiz olaraq baŇüladńĪńüńĪnńĪ iddia etdikd…ô, t…ômizl…ôn…ôn m…ôlumat m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ d…ôyiŇüm…ôk d…ôyiŇüiklik √ß…ôtinlikdir. Lakin, 10 m√ľxt…ôlif NLI veri qurularńĪnda t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôr vasit…ôsil…ô, bu t…ôcr√ľb…ô g√∂r…ôrik ki, biz yalnńĪz hipotez modeli kimi adlandńĪrdńĪńüńĪmńĪz, √ßoxluńüu sńĪnńĪf baz √ßizgisini NLI veri qurularńĪnńĪn bir ne√ß…ôsind…ô daha √ßox √ľst√ľn…ô √ßńĪxara bil…ôr. Bizim analizimiz statistik √ß…ôtinlikl…ôrimiz NLI'nin b…ôzi veril…ôn qurńüularda n…ôy…ô fayda ver…ô bil…ôc…ôyini t…ôsdiql…ôy…ôc…ôyini t…ôsdiql…ôyir.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme hypotézu pouze pro diagnostiku inference přirozeného jazyka (NLI). Zvláště když NLI datová sada předpokládá, že dochází k inferenci čistě na základě vztahu mezi kontextem a hypotézou, vyplývá z toho, že hodnocení implikčních vztahů při ignorování poskytnutého kontextu je degenerovaným řešením. Nicméně, pomocí experimentů na deseti různých datových sadách NLI zjišťujeme, že tento přístup, který označujeme jako model pouze pro hypotézy, je schopen výrazně překonat většinovou základnu v řadě datových sad NLI. Naše analýza naznačuje, že statistické nesrovnalosti mohou umožnit modelu provádět NLI v některých datových sadách nad rámec toho, co by mělo být dosažitelné bez přístupu k kontextu.', 'et': 'Pakume välja hüpoteesi ainult lähtekoha loodusliku keele järelduste diagnoosimiseks. Eriti kui NLI andmekogum eeldab, et järeldused toimuvad puhtalt konteksti ja hüpoteesi vahelise seose põhjal, järeldub, et kaasamissuhete hindamine esitatud konteksti eirates on degeneratiivne lahendus. Siiski leiame 10 erineva NLI andmekogumiga tehtud eksperimentide kaudu, et see lähenemisviis, mida me nimetame ainult hüpoteesidel põhinevaks mudeliks, suudab oluliselt ületada enamikklassi baasi mitmetes NLI andmekogumites. Meie analüüs näitab, et statistilised eeskirjade eiramised võivad võimaldada mudelil teha teatavates andmekogumites nõuetekohaseid analüüse kaugemale sellest, mida peaks olema võimalik saavutada ilma juurdepääsuta kontekstile.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo hipotezu samo početnu liniju za dijagnosticiju infekcije prirodnog jezika (NLI). Posebno kada se NLI podaci pretpostavlja da se infekcija pojavljuje na temelju odnosa između konteksta i hipoteze, sljedeće se da procjena odnosa o želji dok ignorišemo predviđeni kontekst je degeneracijsko rješenje. Međutim, kroz eksperimente na 10 različitih NLI podataka, smatramo da je taj pristup, koji se smatramo samo hipotezom modelom, u stanju značajno nadmašiti početnu liniju većine klase preko broja NLI podataka. Naša analiza ukazuje na to da statističke nepravilnosti mogu omogućiti model izvršavanja NLI u nekim podacima izvan onoga što bi trebalo biti dostupno bez pristupa kontekstu.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n hipotesis slegs basislien vir die diagnosasie van Natuurlike Taal Inferensie (NLI). Spesiaal wanneer 'n NLI datastel aanvaar dat inferensie gebaseer is net op die verhouding tussen 'n konteks en 'n hipotese, dit volg dat die assensie van verhouding verhouding terwyl die verskaf konteks ignoreer is 'n degenerate oplossing. Maar, deur eksperimente op 10 belangrike NLI datastelle, vind ons dat hierdie toegang, na wat ons verwys as 'n hipotees-slegs model, kan betekeurig uitvoer 'n meerderheid-klas basisline oor' n aantal NLI datastelle. Ons analisie stel voorstel dat statistiese ongeregtighede kan toelaat 'n model om NLI in sommige datastel te doen buite wat moet beskikbaar wees sonder toegang tot die konteks.", 'fi': 'Ehdotamme hypoteesia luonnollisen kielen inferenssin (NLI) diagnosoinnille. Varsinkin silloin, kun NLI-aineisto olettaa, että johtopäätös tapahtuu puhtaasti kontekstin ja hypoteesin väliseen suhteeseen perustuen, seuraa, että liitännäissuhteiden arviointi ilman kontekstin huomioimista on rappeutunut ratkaisu. Kymmenellä erillisellä NLI-aineistolla tehtyjen kokeiden avulla voimme kuitenkin todeta, että tämä lähestymistapa, jota kutsumme vain hypoteesimalliksi, pystyy merkittävästi ylittämään enemmistöluokan lähtötilanteen useissa NLI-aineistoissa. Analyysimme osoittaa, että tilastollisten sääntöjenvastaisuuksien perusteella malli voi suorittaa NLI:n joissakin aineistoissa laajemmin kuin olisi saavutettavissa ilman kontekstia.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngerasakno basa kebutuhan langkung nggambar usul kanggo diangkat langkung Language Info (NLI). Mungkin maneh, pas kuwi dataset NLI dumadhi akeh nyimpen langgar wigatining perusahaan dumadhi karo perusahaan karo ipotes, kuwi sumelang sumelang ka nguasai perusahaan langgar wigatining sampek sing ora bisa dumadhi, ka nguasai perusahaan dumadhi winih. Mangko, nik Ngawe Perintah Panjenengan 10 ulih akeh dataset NLI , kita gawe ngono ngono diangkat iki, sing nyimpen seneng suputes-jenengané model, iso diangkat dhéwé ngerasakno diangkat saben nggawe barang NLI dataset . Awalisi awak dhéwé suggerungé supoyo kanggo akeh dadi dengané teka-dengané iso ngebah model kanggo sampek NLI ing batar dadi sing bisa diantesik, winih dhéwé iso dianggap sampek.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים היפותזיה רק בסיסית לאבחנה אינפרנציה לשפה טבעית (NLI). במיוחד כאשר קבוצת נתונים NLI מניחה שהתוצאה מתרחשת מבוססת בלבד על מערכת היחסים בין הקשר וההיפותזיה, זה עוקב כי הערכה מערכת יחסים מעורבים בזמן להתעלם מההקשר המסופק הוא פתרון דגונרטי. ובכל זאת, באמצעות ניסויים על 10 קבוצות נתונים נפרדות של NLI, אנו מוצאים שהגישה הזאת, שאנחנו קוראים לה כמודל היפותזי-בלבד, מסוגלת להעביר באופן משמעותי את רשימת הנתונים במספר קבוצות נתונים של NLI. הניתוח שלנו מציע כי אי-חוקים סטטיסטיים יכולים לאפשר דוגמנית לבצע NLI במספר קבוצות נתונים מעבר למה שעליו להשיג ללא גישה לקונקסט.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo hipotezo samo osnovno izhodišče za diagnosticiranje naravnih jezikovnih inferenc (NLI). Še posebej, če podatkovni niz NLI predpostavlja, da se sklepanje dogaja zgolj na podlagi razmerja med kontekstom in hipotezo, izhaja, da je ocenjevanje vključnih odnosov ob ignoriranju navedenega konteksta degenerativna rešitev. Vendar pa prek poskusov na desetih različnih naborih podatkov NLI ugotavljamo, da je ta pristop, ki ga imenujemo samo model hipotez, sposoben znatno preseči osnovno vrednost večinskega razreda v številnih naborih podatkov NLI. Naša analiza kaže, da lahko statistične nepravilnosti modelu omogočijo izvajanje NLI v nekaterih zbirkah podatkov nad tem, kar bi bilo mogoče doseči brez dostopa do konteksta.', 'ha': "Munã buƙata wani harsunan na'urar da ba'a iya ƙayyade wajen diagnota Infekt of Lugha na Natural (NLI). Kayyai, idan wani tsarin NLI ya yi zato an ci wata fitina kawai ne a kan danganta a tsakanin mazaɓa da wani teyyaki, sai ya bi, idan an haƙurtar dangantaka da ba'a sani ba idan an ƙyale da aka ba shi, wata rabo mai gaggãwa ne. Kayya, kuma, a bayan jarrabai masu tsari na NLI da 10 dabam-daban, za mu gane cewa wannan hanyarwa, da Muke ƙayyade shi kamar misãlin da za'a zama mai amfani da shi kawai, yana iya ƙaranci ga jama'a mafi ƙaranci a tsakanin danne na NLI. AnalyyinMu yana gaya cewa tsarin statistics za'a iya yarda wata motsi da za'a yi amfani da NLI cikin wasu danne-tsari beyond abin da ya kamata a sami idan ba ya iya amfani da mazaɓa ba.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་རིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་Inference (NLI) ལ་ཆ་རྙེད་པར་ལྷག་པར་གཞི་རྟེན་གཅིག་གི་ཆ་བཤད་འདོད་པ་དང་། ཁྱད་པར་ཁྱད་པར་NLI་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་ཞིག་གིས་གསལ་རྐྱེན་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྟགས་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དུ་གཏོང་བའི་སྐབས་ཡིག ཡིན་ནའང་། NLI གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་མི་ཁྱད་པར་ལྡན་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་༡༠་ལས་བརྟན་པར་ ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'Term Definitions Help Hypernymy Detection', 'ar': 'تساعد تعريفات المصطلحات في الكشف عن Hypernymy', 'es': 'Las definiciones de términos ayudan a detectar hipernemias', 'fr': "Les définitions de termes aident à détecter l'hypernymie", 'pt': 'Definições de termos ajudam na detecção de hipernímia', 'ja': '用語の定義はハイパーニミー検出に役立ちます', 'zh': '术语定义有助于检测', 'ru': 'Определения терминов помогают выявлять гипернимию', 'hi': 'शब्द परिभाषाएँ मदद Hypernymy का पता लगाने', 'ga': 'Sainmhínithe Téarma Cabhrú le Brath Hypernymy', 'el': 'Ορισμοί όρων βοηθούν την ανίχνευση υπερνύμων', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A kifejezések definíciói segítséget nyújtanak a hipernímia felismerésében', 'it': 'Le definizioni dei termini aiutano a rilevare ipernimia', 'kk': 'Термендің анықтамасы Хипернимді анықтау', 'lt': 'Terminų apibrėžtys padeda nustatyti hipernimiją', 'mk': 'Термински дефиниции помогнаа за детекција на хипернимија', 'ml': 'ടെര്\u200dമി വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Hipernimi Bantuan Definisi Terma', 'mn': 'Термин тодорхойлолтууд', 'no': 'Teikningar', 'pl': 'Definicje terminów pomagają wykrywać hipernimię', 'ro': 'Definițiile termenilor ajută la detectarea hipernimii', 'sr': 'Definicije termina pomažu da otkrije hipernimu', 'si': 'වාර්තාව විශ්වාස උදව් හායිපරිමි හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'Cawinaada baaritaanka Hypernymy', 'sv': 'Termdefinitioner hjälper till att upptäcka hypernymi', 'ur': 'Term Definitions Help Hypernymy Detection', 'mt': 'Definizzjonijiet tat-Terminu Għajnuna għad-Detezzjoni tal-Ipernimja', 'ta': 'கால வரையறை', 'uz': 'Terminal aniqlari', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Termdefinities helpen hyperniemiedetectie', 'hr': 'Definicije termina pomažu otkriti hipernimu', 'bg': 'Определенията на термините помагат при откриването на хипернимия', 'de': 'Begriffsdefinitionen helfen bei der Erkennung von Hypernymien', 'id': 'Term Definitions Help Hypernymy Detection', 'ko': '용어 정의는 초음파 검사에 도움이 된다', 'fa': 'تعریف\u200cهای کلمه پیدا کردن هوپر نیمی کمک', 'sw': 'Uelelezi wa muda unasaidia Kuchunguza Hypernymy', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': '_Ýery Aňlamak', 'sq': 'Definicionet e Termit ndihmojnë në zbulimin e hipernimisë', 'da': 'Termdefinitioner Hjælp til detektering af hypernymi', 'az': 'Termin Definitions Help Hypernymy Detection', 'bs': 'Definicije termina pomažu otkriti hipernimu', 'ca': "Definicions de termes ajuden a la detecció d'hipernimia", 'cs': 'Definice termínů Nápověda detekci hypernymií', 'hy': 'Comment', 'fi': 'Termien määritelmät auttavat hypernyymin tunnistamista', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bn': 'টার্ম সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সাহায্য করুন Hypernymy Detection', 'et': 'Terminite definitsioonid aitavad hüpernüümiat tuvastada', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Definicije izrazov pomagajo pri odkrivanju hipernimije', 'he': 'הגדרות המונחים עוזרות לגלות היפרנימיה', 'bo': 'དུས་ཡིག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ལ་རོགས་རམ་གྱི་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་བཙལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Existing methods of hypernymy detection mainly rely on statistics over a big corpus, either mining some co-occurring patterns like animals such as cats or embedding words of interest into context-aware vectors. These approaches are therefore limited by the availability of a large enough corpus that can cover all terms of interest and provide sufficient contextual information to represent their meaning. In this work, we propose a new paradigm, HyperDef, for hypernymy detection   expressing word meaning by encoding word definitions, along with context driven representation. This has two main benefits : (i) Definitional sentences express (sense-specific) corpus-independent meanings of words, hence definition-driven approaches enable strong generalization   once trained, the model is expected to work well in open-domain testbeds ; (ii) Global context from a large corpus and definitions provide complementary information for words. Consequently, our model, HyperDef, once trained on task-agnostic data, gets state-of-the-art results in multiple benchmarks', 'ar': 'تعتمد الطرق الحالية للكشف عن فرط التكاثر بشكل أساسي على الإحصائيات على مجموعة كبيرة ، إما التنقيب عن بعض الأنماط المتزامنة مثل "الحيوانات مثل القطط" أو تضمين كلمات ذات أهمية في نواقل مدركة للسياق. وبالتالي ، فإن هذه الأساليب مقيدة بتوافر مجموعة كبيرة بما يكفي يمكن أن تغطي جميع شروط الاهتمام وتوفر معلومات سياقية كافية لتمثيل معناها. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا ، HyperDef ، لاكتشاف hypernymy - للتعبير عن معنى الكلمة من خلال ترميز تعريفات الكلمات ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع التمثيل المستند إلى السياق. هذا له فائدتان رئيسيتان: (1) الجمل التعريفية تعبر عن معاني الكلمات المستقلة (الخاصة بالمعنى) ، وبالتالي فإن النهج القائمة على التعريف تتيح التعميم القوي - بمجرد التدريب ، من المتوقع أن يعمل النموذج بشكل جيد في مجالات اختبار المجال المفتوح ؛ (2) السياق العالمي من مجموعة كبيرة والتعاريف توفر معلومات تكميلية للكلمات. وبالتالي ، فإن نموذجنا ، HyperDef ، بمجرد تدريبه على البيانات الحيادية للمهام ، يحصل على أحدث النتائج في معايير متعددة', 'es': 'Los métodos existentes de detección de hipernimas se basan principalmente en estadísticas sobre un gran corpus, ya sea extrayendo algunos patrones concurrentes como «animales como los gatos» o incorporando palabras de interés en vectores sensibles al contexto. Por lo tanto, estos enfoques están limitados por la disponibilidad de un corpus lo suficientemente grande que pueda cubrir todos los términos de interés y proporcionar suficiente información contextual para representar su significado. En este trabajo, proponemos un nuevo paradigma, HyperDef, para la detección de hipernimas: expresar el significado de las palabras mediante la codificación de definiciones de palabras, junto con la representación basada en el contexto. Esto tiene dos beneficios principales: (i) Las oraciones definitivas expresan significados de palabras (específicos de los sentidos) independientes del cuerpo, por lo que los enfoques basados en definiciones permiten una fuerte generalización; una vez entrenado, se espera que el modelo funcione bien en bancos de pruebas de dominio abierto; (ii) contexto global a partir de un gran corpus y definiciones proporcionar información complementaria para las palabras. En consecuencia, nuestro modelo, HyperDef, una vez entrenado en datos independientes de la tarea, obtiene resultados de vanguardia en múltiples puntos de referencia', 'pt': 'Os métodos existentes de detecção de hipernímia dependem principalmente de estatísticas sobre um grande corpus, seja minerando alguns padrões co-ocorrentes como “animais como gatos” ou incorporando palavras de interesse em vetores sensíveis ao contexto. Essas abordagens são, portanto, limitadas pela disponibilidade de um corpus grande o suficiente para cobrir todos os termos de interesse e fornecer informações contextuais suficientes para representar seu significado. Neste trabalho, propomos um novo paradigma, HyperDef, para detecção de hipernímia – expressando o significado das palavras codificando definições de palavras, juntamente com a representação orientada pelo contexto. Isso tem dois benefícios principais: (i) Frases de definição expressam significados de palavras independentes de corpus (específicos de sentido), portanto, abordagens orientadas por definição permitem uma forte generalização – uma vez treinado, espera-se que o modelo funcione bem em testbeds de domínio aberto; (ii) O contexto global de um grande corpus e definições fornecem informações complementares para as palavras. Consequentemente, nosso modelo, HyperDef, uma vez treinado em dados agnósticos de tarefa, obtém resultados de última geração em vários benchmarks', 'fr': "Les méthodes existantes de détection de l'hypernymie reposent principalement sur des statistiques sur un vaste corpus, soit en explorant certains modèles concomitants tels que «\xa0des animaux tels que des chats\xa0», soit en intégrant des mots d'intérêt dans des vecteurs sensibles au contexte. Ces approches sont donc limitées par la disponibilité d'un corpus suffisamment large pouvant couvrir tous les termes d'intérêt et fournir suffisamment d'informations contextuelles pour représenter leur signification. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un nouveau paradigme, HyperDEF, pour la détection de l'hypernymie\xa0: exprimer la signification des mots en codant des définitions de mots, ainsi qu'une représentation basée sur le contexte. Cela présente deux avantages principaux\xa0: (i) les phrases de définition expriment des significations des mots (spécifiques au sens) indépendantes du corps, donc les approches axées sur la définition permettent une forte généralisation — une fois formé, le modèle devrait fonctionner correctement dans des bancs d'essai de domaine ouvert\xa0; (ii) Contexte global à partir d'un vaste corpus et de définitions fournir des informations complémentaires pour les mots. Par conséquent, notre modèle, HyperDEF, une fois formé sur des données indépendantes de la tâche, obtient des résultats de pointe dans de multiples benchmarks", 'ja': 'ハイパーニミー検出の既存の方法は、「ネコなどの動物」のようないくつかの共起パターンをマイニングするか、または文脈認識ベクトルに関心のある単語を埋め込むかのいずれかで、主に大きなコーパス上の統計に依存しています。 したがって、これらのアプローチは、関心のあるすべての用語をカバーし、それらの意味を表すのに十分なコンテキスト情報を提供することができる十分に大きなコーパスの利用可能性によって制限される。 この研究では、ハイパーニミー検出のための新しいパラダイム、HyperDefを提案します。コンテキスト駆動表現とともに、単語定義をエンコードすることによって単語の意味を表現します。 これには、2つの主な利点があります。（ i ）定義文は（センス固有の）単語のコーパスに依存しない意味を表現するため、定義駆動型アプローチは強力な一般化を可能にします。一度訓練されると、モデルはオープンドメインのテストベッドでうまく機能すると予想されます。（ ii ）大規模なコーパスと定義からのグローバルコンテキストは、単語の補完的な情報を提供します。 その結果、当社のモデルであるHyperDefは、タスク非推測データのトレーニングを受けた後、複数のベンチマークで最先端の結果を得ることができます', 'zh': '今超音速检之法,赖于语料库之统计数据,或掘其同式,或销其感趣之单词于上下文向量。 故其法足以大语料库可用性,语料库可以涵盖诸术语,足上下文息以示其义。 于是条上新式HyperDef,以检测之 - 因编码单词定义及上下文驱以表单词义。 此二要者:(i)义句(特定义)语料库无关单词义,故定义驱之可以成强泛化 - 一旦教习,则开域测试平台中善事。 (二) 自大语料库及定义者全球背景为词语以补信息。 故吾模样HyperDef一习于任事无关之数,则于数准测试之最先进也。', 'ru': 'Существующие методы обнаружения гипернимии в основном опираются на статистику по большому корпусу, либо добывая некоторые совместно встречающиеся паттерны, такие как «животные, такие как кошки», либо встраивая интересующие слова в контекстно-зависимые векторы. Таким образом, эти подходы ограничены наличием достаточно большого корпуса, который может охватывать все интересующие его термины и обеспечивать достаточную контекстуальную информацию для отражения их смысла. В этой работе мы предлагаем новую парадигму, HyperDef, для обнаружения гипернимии – выражение значения слова путем кодирования определений слова, наряду с контекстно-зависимым представлением. Это имеет два основных преимущества: i) предложения определений выражают (в зависимости от смысла) независимые от корпуса значения слов, поэтому подходы, основанные на определении, позволяют сильное обобщение – после обучения ожидается, что модель будет хорошо работать на испытательных полигонах с открытым доменом; ii) глобальный контекст из большого корпуса и определений предоставляет дополнительную информацию для слов. Следовательно, наша модель, HyperDef, однажды обученная на данных диагностики задач, получает самые современные результаты в нескольких тестах', 'hi': 'हाइपरनिमी डिटेक्शन के मौजूदा तरीके मुख्य रूप से एक बड़े कॉर्पस पर आंकड़ों पर भरोसा करते हैं, या तो "बिल्लियों जैसे जानवरों" जैसे कुछ सह-घटित पैटर्न खनन करते हैं या संदर्भ-जागरूक वैक्टर में रुचि के शब्दों को एम्बेड करते हैं। इसलिए ये दृष्टिकोण एक बड़े पर्याप्त कॉर्पस की उपलब्धता से सीमित हैं जो ब्याज की सभी शर्तों को कवर कर सकते हैं और उनके अर्थ का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए पर्याप्त प्रासंगिक जानकारी प्रदान कर सकते हैं। इस काम में, हम हाइपरनिमी डिटेक्शन के लिए एक नया प्रतिमान, हाइपरडेफ का प्रस्ताव करते हैं - संदर्भ संचालित प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ-साथ शब्द परिभाषाओं को एन्कोडिंग करके शब्द अर्थ व्यक्त करते हैं। इसके दो मुख्य लाभ हैं: (i) परिभाषात्मक वाक्य शब्दों के (अर्थ-विशिष्ट) कॉर्पस-स्वतंत्र अर्थों को व्यक्त करते हैं, इसलिए परिभाषा-संचालित दृष्टिकोण मजबूत सामान्यीकरण को सक्षम करते हैं - एक बार प्रशिक्षित होने के बाद, मॉडल से खुले-डोमेन टेस्टबेड में अच्छी तरह से काम करने की उम्मीद की जाती है; (ii) एक बड़े कोष और परिभाषाओं से वैश्विक संदर्भ शब्दों के लिए पूरक जानकारी प्रदान करते हैं। नतीजतन, हमारा मॉडल, हाइपरडेफ, एक बार कार्य-अज्ञेयवादी डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित होने के बाद, कई बेंचमार्क में अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है', 'ga': 'Braitheann na modhanna atá ann cheana féin chun hipirimide a bhrath go príomha ar staitisticí thar chorpas mór, ag mionú ar roinnt patrúin comh-tharlaitheacha ar nós “ainmhithe ar nós cait” nó ag neadú focail spéise i veicteoirí atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs. Tá teorainn leis na cineálacha cur chuige sin mar sin toisc go bhfuil corpas mór go leor ar fáil a fhéadfaidh gach téarma spéise a chlúdach agus faisnéis leordhóthanach comhthéacsúil a sholáthar chun a gcuid brí a léiriú. Sa saothar seo, molaimid paradigm nua, HyperDef, chun hipirimide a bhrath – brí focal a chur in iúl trí shainmhínithe focal a ionchódú, mar aon le hionadaíocht atá bunaithe ar chomhthéacs. Tá dhá phríomhbhuntáiste ag baint leis seo: (i) Cuireann abairtí sainmhínithe bríonna corpas-neamhspleách (ciall-shonrach) na bhfocal in iúl, dá bhrí sin is féidir ginearálú láidir a dhéanamh ar mhodhanna cur chuige atá bunaithe ar shainiú – nuair a bheidh an tsamhail oilte, táthar ag súil go n-oibreoidh an tsamhail go maith i leapacha tástála fearainn oscailte; (ii) Soláthraíonn comhthéacs domhanda ó chorpas mór agus sainmhínithe faisnéis chomhlántach ar fhocail. Mar thoradh air sin, faigheann ár múnla, HyperDef, a luaithe a bhíonn oiliúint déanta aige ar shonraí tasc-agnostic, torthaí den scoth i dtagarmharcanna iolracha.', 'ka': "ჰიპერნიმის განახლების მიმდინარე მეტირები ძირითადად იყენება დიდი კორპუსის სტატისტიკზე, ან იყოს ერთადერთად მოხდებული სტატიკები, როგორც 'ცხოვრები, როგორც კატები' ან ინტერესტიკის სი ამიტომ, ეს დახმარება უფრო დიდი კორპუსის მისამართობით, რომელიც შესაძლებელია ყველა ინტერესტის შესახებ და შესაძლებელია მსგავსი კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია, რომელი ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ახალი პარადიგმა, HyperDef, ჰიპერნიმის განახლებისთვის - სიტყვის სიტყვის სიტყვის განსაზღვრებით გამოყენებული სიტყვის განსაზღვრებით, კონტექსტური განახ ეს აქვს ორი მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულება: i) განსახულების გამოსახულება (განსახულების განსახულების) სიტყვების შესახებ კორპუს-განსახულების გამოსახულება, ამიტომ განსახულების გამოსახულება ძალიან გენერალიზაციას შეუძ ii) გლობალური კონტექსტი დიდი კორპუსის და განსაზღვრებისგან კომპლენტური ინფორმაცია სიტყვებისთვის. შემდეგ ჩვენი მოდელ HyperDef, ერთხელ მოცემებით დააკეთებული მონაცემებისთვის მონაცემებისთვის, მიიღება მრავალური მონაცემებით", 'it': 'I metodi esistenti di rilevamento dell\'ipernimia si basano principalmente su statistiche su un corpus grande, o estraendo alcuni modelli co-esistenti come "animali come gatti" o incorporando parole di interesse in vettori consapevoli del contesto. Questi approcci sono quindi limitati dalla disponibilità di un corpus sufficientemente ampio in grado di coprire tutti i termini di interesse e fornire informazioni contestuali sufficienti per rappresentarne il significato. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un nuovo paradigma, HyperDef, per il rilevamento dell\'ipernimia - esprimere il significato delle parole codificando le definizioni delle parole, insieme alla rappresentazione guidata dal contesto. Ciò ha due vantaggi principali: (i) le frasi definizionali esprimono significati (specifici dei sensi) indipendenti dal corpo delle parole, quindi approcci basati sulla definizione consentono una forte generalizzazione - una volta addestrato, il modello dovrebbe funzionare bene nei banchi di prova a dominio aperto; (ii) Contesto globale da un ampio corpus e definizioni forniscono informazioni complementari per le parole. Di conseguenza, il nostro modello HyperDef, una volta addestrato sui dati agnostici delle attività, ottiene risultati all\'avanguardia in più benchmark', 'kk': 'Гипернимді анықтау әдістері негізінде үлкен корпус арқылы статистикаға тәуелді, немесе "мындай жануарлар", немесе "мындай жануарлар", немесе контексті түсінікті векторларға қызықтық сөздерді ендіру үшін бі Сондықтан бұл жағдайларды бір үлкен корпус қолдануға шектеп, барлық қызықтық тәртібін табу және олардың мағынасын көрсетуге жеткілікті контексті мәліметті жеткілікт Бұл жұмыс ішінде гипернимді анықтау үшін жаңа парадигм, HyperDef- тізбекті анықтау үшін - сөзді кодтамасын анықтау үшін сөзді анықтау үшін, контексті түрлендіру үшін. Бұл үшін екі негізгі нәтижесі бар: i) анықтамалы сөздерді (міндетті түсінікті) корпус тәуелсіз сөздердің мәліметі болады, сондықтан анықтамаға арналған жағдайлары күшті жалпы жалпы түрлендіру мүмкіндігін қолдану ii) үлкен корпус мен анықтамаларының жалпы контексті сөздерге қосымша мәлімет береді. Сондықтан біздің үлгіміз HyperDef, тапсырма-агностикалық деректеріне оқылған кезде, бірнеше бағдарламалардың күй- жағдайын бірнеше бағдарламалардың нәтижесін алады.', 'lt': 'Esami hiperinimos aptikimo metodai daugiausia grindžiami didelio korpuso statistika, arba kasdinant tam tikrus kartu pasitaikančius modelius, pavyzdžiui, "gyvūnus, pavyzdžiui, kates", arba įtraukiant interesingus žodžius į aplinkybes žinomus vektorius. Todėl tokie metodai ribojami turimu pakankamai dideliu korpusu, kuris galėtų apimti visas interesų sąlygas ir suteikti pakankamai kontekstinės informacijos jų reikšmei atspindėti. Šiame darbe siūlome naują hiperinimos aptikimo paradigm ą HyperDef - žodžio reikšmę išreikšti koduojant žodžių apibrėžimus kartu su kontekstu pagrįstu atstovavimu. This has two main benefits: (i) Definitional sentences express (sense-specific) corpus-independent meanings of words, hence definition-driven approaches enable strong generalization - once trained, the model is expected to work well in open-domain testbeds;  ii) Visuotinė didelės apimties aplinkybė ir apibrėžimai suteikia papildomą informaciją žodžiams. Taigi mūsų modelis HyperDef, apmokytas užduočių agnostiniais duomenimis, gauna pažangiausius rezultatus pagal įvairius lyginamuosius rodiklius.', 'mk': 'Постојаните методи за детекција на хипернимија се зависат главно од статистика во врска со големиот корпус, или рудајќи некои соопштени шеми како „животни како мачки“ или вградувајќи зборови од интерес во вектори свесни за контекст. Овие пристапи се, затоа, ограничени од достапноста на доволно голем корпус кој може да ги покрие сите услови на интерес и да обезбеди доволно контекстуални информации за да го претставува нивното значење. Во оваа работа, предложуваме нов парадигм, Хипердеф, за детекција на хипернимија - изразување на зборот значење со кодирање на дефиниции на зборот, заедно со контекстно представување. Ова има две главни бенефиции: (i) Дефинитивните реченици изразуваат (специфични за чувството) независни значења на зборовите од корпусот, со што пристапите водени од дефинирање овозможуваат силна генерализација - откако ќе биде обучен, моделот се очекува да функционира добро во тестовите на от (ii) Global context from a large corpus and definitions provide complementary information for words.  Како резултат на тоа, нашиот модел, Хипердеф, еднаш трениран на податоци за агностика на задачите, добива најсовремени резултати во повеќето резултати', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι ανίχνευσης υπερνύμων βασίζονται κυρίως σε στατιστικά στοιχεία πάνω από ένα μεγάλο σώμα, είτε εξορύσσοντας κάποια συνεμφανιζόμενα πρότυπα όπως "ζώα όπως οι γάτες" είτε ενσωματώνοντας λέξεις ενδιαφέροντος σε φορείς που γνωρίζουν το πλαίσιο. Συνεπώς, οι προσεγγίσεις αυτές περιορίζονται από τη διαθεσιμότητα ενός αρκετά μεγάλου σώματος που μπορεί να καλύψει όλους τους όρους ενδιαφέροντος και να παρέχει επαρκείς πληροφορίες που να αντιπροσωπεύουν το νόημά τους. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο παράδειγμα, για την ανίχνευση υπερνύμων και την έκφραση της έννοιας λέξεων με κωδικοποίηση ορισμών λέξεων, μαζί με αναπαράσταση βασισμένη στο πλαίσιο. Αυτό έχει δύο κύρια οφέλη: (i) Οι οριστικές προτάσεις εκφράζουν (συγκεκριμένες αισθήσεις) έννοιες λέξεων ανεξάρτητα από το σώμα, επομένως οι προσεγγίσεις που βασίζονται στον ορισμό επιτρέπουν ισχυρή γενίκευση, αφού μόλις εκπαιδευτεί, το μοντέλο αναμένεται να λειτουργήσει καλά σε δοκιμαστικά κρεβάτια ανοικτού τομέα. (ii) Το παγκόσμιο πλαίσιο από ένα μεγάλο σώμα και οι ορισμοί παρέχουν συμπληρωματικές πληροφορίες για τις λέξεις. Ως εκ τούτου, το μοντέλο μας, αφού εκπαιδευτεί σε δεδομένα χωρίς εργασία, λαμβάνει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε πολλαπλά κριτήρια αναφοράς', 'hu': 'A hipernímia kimutatásának már meglévő módszerei elsősorban egy nagy korpuszon feletti statisztikákon alapulnak, vagy bányásznak néhány egyidejűleg előforduló mintát, mint például "állatok, mint például macskák", vagy beágyaznak érdekes szavakat kontextustudatos vektorokba. Ezeket a megközelítéseket ezért korlátozza egy elég nagy korpusz rendelkezésre állása, amely lefedi az összes érdeklődési feltételt, és elegendő kontextuális információt biztosít a jelentésük megjelenítéséhez. Ebben a munkában egy új paradigmát javasolunk, a HyperDef-et, amely a szó jelentését a szódefiníciók kódolásával, valamint a kontextusvezérelt reprezentációval fejezi ki. Ennek két fő előnye van: (i) A definíciós mondatok kifejezik a szavak (érzékspecifikus) corpus-független jelentését, ezért a definícióvezérelt megközelítések erőteljes általánosítást tesznek lehetővé - miután képzett, a modell várhatóan jól működik nyílt domain tesztágyakban; (ii) Egy nagy korpuszból származó globális kontextus és definíciók kiegészítő információt nyújtanak a szavakhoz. Következésképpen modellünk, a HyperDef, amely a feladat-agnosztikus adatokra képzett, korszerű eredményeket ér el több referenciaértékben.', 'ms': "Kaedah terdapat pengesan hipernimi terutamanya bergantung pada statistik melalui korpus besar, sama ada menggabungkan beberapa corak yang berlaku sama seperti 'haiwan seperti kucing' atau memasukkan kata-kata yang berminat ke vektor yang sedar-konteks. Pendekatan ini disebabkan oleh kebebasan corpus yang cukup besar yang boleh meliputi semua terma kepentingan dan menyediakan maklumat kontekstual yang cukup untuk mewakili makna mereka. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan paradigm a baru, HyperDef, untuk pengesan hipernimi - ungkapan makna perkataan dengan mengekodkan definisi perkataan, bersama dengan perwakilan konteks dipandu. This has two main benefits: (i) Definitional sentences express (sense-specific) corpus-independent meanings of words, hence definition-driven approaches enable strong generalization - once trained, the model is expected to work well in open-domain testbeds;  (ii) Konteks global dari korpus besar dan takrifan menyediakan maklumat kumplimentar untuk perkataan. Oleh sebab itu, model kita, HyperDef, sekali dilatih pada data tugas-agnostik, mendapat keputusan state-of-the-art dalam berbagai tanda referensi", 'ml': 'ഹൈപ്രെനിമി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു വലിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സംഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അതുകൊണ്ട് ഈ പ്രവേശങ്ങള്\u200d അതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു വലിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ ലഭ്യമാണ്. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dഡിഫ്, ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dഡിഫ്, ഹൈപ്രെനിമി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ഒരു പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. വ ഇതില്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രധാന ഉപകാരങ്ങളുണ്ട്: (i) വാക്കുകളുടെ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നു (മനസ്സിലാക്കി- സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം) വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന (ii) Global context from a large corpus and definitions provide complementary information for words.  അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d, ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dഡിഫ്, ഒരിക്കല്\u200d ജോലി-അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക് ഡേറ്റാകളില്\u200d പരിശീലനം ചെയ്തിട്ടുണ്ടായിരുന്നു, സ്ഥ', 'mt': 'Il-metodi eżistenti ta’ detezzjoni ta’ iperinimi jiddependu prinċipalment fuq statistika fuq korpus kbir, jew iħaddmu xi mudelli li jseħħu fl-istess ħin bħal ‘annimali bħall-qtates’ jew jinkorporaw kliem ta’ interess f’vetturi konxji mill-kuntest. These approaches are therefore limited by the availability of a large enough corpus that can cover all terms of interest and provide sufficient contextual information to represent their meaning.  F’din il-ħidma, qed nipproponu paradigm a ġdida, HyperDef, għad-detezzjoni tal-ipernimija - li tesprimi t-tifsira tal-kelma billi nikkodifikaw id-definizzjonijiet tal-kelma, flimkien mar-rappreżentazzjoni mmexxija mill-kuntest. Dan għandu żewġ benefiċċji ewlenin: (i) Sentenzi definittivi espressi (speċifiċi għas-sens) tifsiriet ta’ kliem indipendenti mill-korpus, għalhekk approċċi mmexxija mid-definizzjoni jippermettu ġeneralizzazzjoni qawwija - ladarba jitħarreġ, il-mudell huwa mistenni li jaħdem tajjeb f’postijiet tat-test b’dominju miftuħ; (ii) Il-kuntest globali minn korpus kbir u definizzjonijiet jipprovdu informazzjoni kumplimentari għall-kliem. Konsegwentement, il-mudell tagħna, HyperDef, ladarba ġie mħarreġ fuq dejta tal-kompitu-agnostika, jikseb riżultati l-aktar avvanzati f’diversi punti ta’ riferiment', 'no': 'Det eksisterande metodane for hypernymoppdaging er hovudsakelig på statistikk over ein stor korpus, anten mining av nokre samtidige mønster som «dyrar som kattar» eller innbygging av ord med interesse i kontekst-vektorar. Desse tilnærmingane er derfor begrenset av tilgjengeligheten av ein stor nok korpus som kan dekke alle betinger av interesse og gje tilstrekkelig kontekstinformasjon for å representera sin mening. I denne arbeida foreslår vi eit ny paradigm, HyperDef, for hypernymoppdaging – uttrykk ordmengde ved koding av orddefinisjonar, saman med kontekstdrivt representasjon. Dette har to hovudfordeler: i) Definitivne setningar uttrykk (følelsespektiv) korpus-uavhengige betinger av ord, derfor definisjon-drivte tilnærmingar slår på sterk generalisering – når det er trengt, forventar modellen å arbeide godt i åpne domenetestbeder; og ii) Global kontekst frå ein stor korpus og definisjonar gjev komplementar informasjon om ord. Det er derfor vårt modell HyperDef, når det trengst på oppgåve-agnostiske data, får status-of-the-art resultat i fleire benchmarker', 'pl': 'Istniejące metody wykrywania hipernimii opierają się głównie na statystykach w dużym korpusie, albo wydobywając pewne współwystępujące wzorce, takie jak "zwierzęta takie jak koty", albo osadzając interesujące słowa w wektorach świadomych kontekstu. Podejścia te są zatem ograniczone dostępnością wystarczająco dużego korpusu, który może obejmować wszystkie warunki zainteresowania i dostarczyć wystarczających informacji kontekstowych, aby reprezentować ich znaczenie. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nowy paradygmat, HyperDef, służący do wykrywania hipernimii wyrażający znaczenie słowa poprzez kodowanie definicji słów, wraz z reprezentacją kontekstową. Ma to dwie główne korzyści: (i) zdania definicyjne wyrażają znaczenia słów niezależne od zmysłu, stąd podejścia oparte na definicjach umożliwiają silne uogólnienie, a po przeszkolonym modelu oczekuje się, że model będzie działał dobrze w otwartych domenach testowych; (ii) Globalny kontekst z dużego korpusu i definicje zapewniają uzupełniające informacje dla słów. W konsekwencji nasz model HyperDef, po przeszkoleniu na danych niezależnych od zadań, uzyskuje najnowocześniejsze wyniki w wielu wskaźnikach odniesienia', 'ro': 'Metodele existente de detectare a hipernimii se bazează în principal pe statistici peste un corp mare, fie extragând unele tipare care apar concomitent, cum ar fi "animale cum ar fi pisicile", fie încorporând cuvinte de interes în vectori conștienți de context. Prin urmare, aceste abordări sunt limitate de disponibilitatea unui corpus suficient de mare care să acopere toți termenii de interes și să ofere suficiente informații contextuale pentru a reprezenta sensul lor. În această lucrare, propunem o nouă paradigmă, HyperDef, pentru detectarea hiperinimiei - exprimarea semnificației cuvintelor prin codificarea definițiilor cuvintelor, împreună cu reprezentarea contextuală. Acest lucru are două beneficii principale: (i) propozițiile definiționale exprimă semnificații independente de corp (specifice sensului) ale cuvintelor, prin urmare abordările bazate pe definiție permit generalizarea puternică - odată instruit, modelul este de așteptat să funcționeze bine în paturi de testare open-domain; (ii) Contextul global dintr-un corpus larg și definițiile oferă informații complementare pentru cuvinte. În consecință, modelul nostru HyperDef, odată instruit pe datele agnostice ale sarcinilor, obține rezultate de ultimă oră în mai multe criterii de referință', 'sr': "Postoje metode detekcije hipernimi oslanjaju se uglavnom na statistiku o velikom korpusu, ili rudarstvu nekih zajedničkih obrazaca poput 'životinja poput mačka' ili uključujući riječi interesa u vektore koji su svesni konteksta. Ovi pristupi su stoga ograničeni dostupnošću velikog korpusa koji može pokriti sve uvjete interesa i pružiti dovoljno kontekstualnih informacija kako bi predstavljali njihovo značenje. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu paradigmu, HyperDef, za hipernimu otkrivanje - izražavanje reči značenja kodiranjem definicija riječi, zajedno sa kontekstskim predstavljanjem. Ovo ima dve glavne prednosti: i) Definicione rečenice izražavaju (posebne osjećaje) nezavisnih značenja reči, zato su pristupi na definiciji omogućili jaku generalizaciju - jednom obučenom, očekuje se da će model dobro raditi u testu krevetima otvorenog domena; ii) Globalni kontekst od velikog korpusa i definicija pruža dodatne informacije za reči. Stoga, naš model, HyperDef, jednom treniran na podacima agenta-agnostika, dobija rezultate stanja umjetnosti u višestrukim kriterijama.", 'si': "හායිපර්නිමි පරීක්ෂණයේ තියෙන විදිහට ප්\u200dරධාන විදිහට ලොකු කොර්පුස් වල සංඛ්යාත්මක විදිහට විශ්වාස කරනවා, නැත්තම් 'පුත්තු ව මේ අනුවිධානය සීමාවිත විශාල විශාල කොර්පස් එක්ක ලොකු විශාල තියෙන්න පුළුවන් හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ආවරණය සහ ඔවුන මේ වැඩේ අපි අළුත් පාර්ඩිග්ම්, Hyperdef, හායිපර්නිමි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් - වචන අදහස් කිරීමේ වචන විශ්වාස වලින් සංකේතනය කරන මේකට ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් දෙකක් තියෙනවා: (i) විශ්වාසික වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් (අවශ්\u200dය) කොර්පස් ස්වත්වික වචන වචන, ඉතින් විශ්වාසි (i) ලොකු කොර්පුස් සහ විශ්වාසයෙන් ලෝකික සංවේදනය වචන සම්පූර්ණ තොරතුරු දෙනවා. ඉතින්, අපේ මොඩේල්, HyperDep, වැඩක්-agnoසික් දත්තේ පුහුණු වෙලාවක්, ස්ථානය-of-the-art ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගොඩක් බෙන්ච්මා", 'so': "Dhaqdhaqaaqa aad u weyn oo aad u baahan tahay, waxaa ugu horeyn isku xiran takhasusyo ku saabsan meelo uu ku baahan yahay sida xayawaanka sida cuntada ama ku qoran hadalka xiisaha ah waddooyinka aad u yaqaan. Sidaa darteed soo dhowaanshahaas waa xad ka dhigan karaa helitaanka xubin weyn oo ku filan, kaas oo dabooli kara shuruudaha xiiseha oo dhan, wuxuuna bixiyaa macluumaad ku filan oo ku saabsan, si ay ula jeedaan micneheeda. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa paradigm cusub, HyperDef, si aad u ogaato jaabinta hypernymi - taasoo lagu qoro hadal micnaheedu yahay qoraalka kooban, iyadoo lagu qoro muuqashada kooxda. Kanu waxay leedahay laba faa'iido oo muhiim ah: (i) hadallada cayiman oo ku qoran (xigmad-cayiman) micnahooda xor la'aanta ah ee hadalka, sababtaas darteed qalabka lagu sawiray waxay awoodaa in la sameeyo wax xoog badan - marka la tababariyo, waxaa laga rajaynayaa in modelku si wanaagsan looga shaqeeyo jardiinada furan; (ii) Midabka caalamiga ah oo ka soo jeeda qoraalo waaweyn iyo qoraal ah, waxaad ka heleysaa macluumaad kaamil ah oo ku saabsan hadalka. Sida darteed, modelkeenna HyperDef, marka lagu tababaray macluumaad-agnostic, wuxuu helaa xaalad-of-the-art wuxuu ka helaa bangiyo badan", 'sv': 'Befintliga metoder för hypernymymi detektering bygger huvudsakligen på statistik över en stor korpus, antingen utvinna vissa samtidiga mönster som "djur som katter" eller bädda in ord av intresse i kontextmedvetna vektorer. Dessa tillvägagångssätt begränsas därför av tillgången till en tillräckligt stor korpus som kan täcka alla intressevillkor och ge tillräcklig kontextuell information för att representera deras betydelse. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett nytt paradigm, HyperDef, för hypernymy detektion - uttrycka ordbetydelse genom kodning av orddefinitioner, tillsammans med kontextdriven representation. Detta har två huvudsakliga fördelar: (i) Definitionella meningar uttrycker (sinnesspecifika) korpusoberoende betydelser av ord, därför definitionsdrivna tillvägagångssätt möjliggör stark generalisering - en gång tränat, förväntas modellen fungera bra i öppna domäntestbäddar; (ii) Globalt sammanhang från en stor korpus och definitioner ger kompletterande information för ord. Följaktligen får vår modell HyperDef, som en gång tränat på uppgiftsoberostiska data, toppmoderna resultat i flera riktmärken', 'ta': "மிக பெரிய கூட்டத்திற்கு மேல் உள்ள முறைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் முறையாக புள்ளிவிவரங்களை சார்ந்து கொள்கிறது, அல்லது 'பூச்சு' போன்ற சில சமநிகழ்ந்த மு ஆகையால் இந்த முன்னேற்றங்கள் எல்லா வட்டிக்கைகளையும் மற்றும் அதன் அர்த்தத்தைக் குறிக்க போதுமான பெரிய குறியீட்டின் கொண் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய அளபுருக்கம், ஹைப்பர்டிப் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு, மின்னெழுத்து கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு, சொல்லின் அர்த்தம் கு இதில் இரண்டு முக்கிய பயன்பாடுகள் இருக்கிறது: (i) குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தைகளை கூறும் (உணர்வு- குறிப்பிட்ட) கோர்பாஸ்- சுதந்திரமான அர்த்தைகள் கூறுகிறது, அதனால் விவர (ii) ஒரு பெரிய கோர்புஸ் மற்றும் விளக்கங்களிலிருந்து பொதுவான சூழ்நிலையில் இருந்து சிக்கலான வா ஆகையால், எங்கள் மாதிரி, ஹைப்பர்டிப், பணியின் குறிப்பு தகவல்களில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, நிலையில் கலை முடிவுகள் பல பென்மேக்", 'ur': "ہیپر نیمی شناسایی کے موجود طریقے ہیں جو اکثر ایک بڑے کورپوس پر استحصار کرتے ہیں، یا کچھ ایسے طریقے پڑھنے والے پٹرنے لگتے ہیں جیسے 'گاٹے جیسے' یا سوچے لگتے ہیں جن کی علاقہ سمجھنے والی ویکتروں میں. لہٰذا یہ طریقے محدود ہیں ایک بڑے کافی جسم کے موجود ہیں جو ہر قسم کے شرط کو پورا کرسکتا ہے اور ان کے معنی کے لئے کافی موجود معلومات دے سکتا ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم نے ایک نوی پارادیگ، HyperDef، ہیرنیمی شناسایی کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتا ہے - کلمات کا مطلب اکڈینڈ کلمات کی تعریف کے ذریعہ بیان کرتا ہے، اور کنٹنسیٹ کی پیشنهاد کے ساتھ۔ اس کے لئے دو اصلی فائدے ہیں: (i) تعریف کے مطابق کلمات کی تعریف کرتی ہیں (احساس خاص) کلمات کے متعلق غیر مستقل ہیں، اسی وجہ سے تعریف کے مطابق مضبوط طریقوں کو مضبوط عمومی تعریف کرتی ہیں - ایک بار تعریف کی جاتی ہے، مدل کی انتظار کی جاتی ہے کہ کھلی دامنی (ii) ایک بڑے کورپوس اور معلومات سے گلوبل کنٹکس کلمات کے لئے اضافہ معلومات پیش کرتا ہے. لہٰذا، ہمارے مدل، HyperDef، ایک بار تاسک-agnostic ڈاٹی پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے، بہت سی بنچم مارک کے نتیجے ملتے ہیں", 'mn': 'Хиперним тогтоох аргыг ихэвчлэн том корпус дээр тодорхой статистик дээр хамтран үйлдвэрлэх, эсвэл "муур шиг амьтдын жишээ" эсвэл хамтран үйлдвэрлэх загваруудыг тодорхой векторууд руу оруулдаг. Тиймээс эдгээр арга барилгууд нь хангалттай том корпус хангалттай байдлаар хязгаарлагддаг. Энэ нь бүх сонирхолтой байдлыг дүүргэж, тэдний утгыг илэрхийлж хангалттай орчин үеийн мэдээллийг хангалттай өгдөг Энэ ажил дээр бид гиперним ойлголтын тулд шинэ парадигм, HyperDef гэх мэт санал болгож байна. Үүний утгыг хэлбэрээр кодлох үг тодорхойлолтоор илэрхийлдэг. Энэ нь хоёр чухал ашигтай: i) тодорхойлолтын өгүүлбэрүүд хэлэхэд (мэдрэмжтэй) хэлбэрээс хамааралтай үгсийг илэрхийлж чаддаг. Иймээс тодорхойлолтын арга баримтууд хүчтэй ерөнхийлөгч байдаг. Нэг удаа сургалтын тулд загвар нь нээлттэй ii) Томоохон корпус болон тодорхойлолтуудын дэлхийн нөхцөл байдал үгийг нэмэлт мэдээллийг өгдөг. Үүнээс бидний загвар HyperDef, ажлын агностик өгөгдлийн талаар суралцагдсан нэгэн удаа, урлагийн байдал нь олон салбарын үр дүнг авдаг.', 'uz': "Hypermani aniqlash usullari asosida katta kopusdagi statistikaslarga ishlatadi, yoki huddi 'чорвалар' kabi bir necha shakllarni qo'yish mumkin, yoki qiziqaruvchining qiziqarli so'zlarini taʼminlovchi vektoriga qo'yish mumkin. Шундай қилиб, бу назоратлар фақирликни бажариш ва ўз манфаатларини кўрсатиш учун етарли маълумотларни фойдалантириш мумкин, катта моддий қизиқий қизиқлик мавжуд. Bu ishda, HyperDef, hypernium aniqlash uchun yangi paradigm - so'zni kodlash aniqlash imkoniyatini anglatish mumkin. Kodlash usulini kodlash imkoniyati bilan bir xizmatni tahrirlash mumkin. Bu ikki asosiy foydalanuvchilar bor: (i) Shaxsiy so'zlar (ma'lum- notoʻgʻri so'zlarning imkoniyatlarini tasdiqlash mumkin, shunday qilib aniqlash imkoniyatlarini bajarish mumkin - bir marta o'rnatilgan foydalanish mumkin, model ochiq domen tizimlarida yaxshi ishlamaydi; (二) Umumiy tarkibi ifodalar va taʼriflar uchun murakkab maʼlumot beradi. Va shunday qilib, bizning modelimiz HyperDef, vazifa-agnostik maʼlumotida o'rganishda bir necha bog'lamalardan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Các phương pháp phát hiện hiện siêu cuồng động chủ yếu dựa trên các thống kê trên một tập thể lớn, hoặc khai thác các mô hình hiện hữu như "động vật như mèo" hoặc nhập các từ đáng chú ý vào các cỗ máy nhận diện ngữ cảnh. Những phương pháp này bị hạn chế bởi khả năng có một tập đoàn đủ lớn có thể bao gồm tất cả các điều khoản và cung cấp thông tin ngữ cảnh đủ để đại diện cho ý nghĩa của chúng. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình mới, HyperDef, để phát hiện siêu nữ từ, diễn tả nghĩa là từ bằng cách mã hóa các từ định nghĩa, cùng với các mô tả dẫn ngữ cảnh. Đi ều này có hai lợi ích chính: Một tập đoàn lớn và định nghĩa trên toàn cầu cung cấp thông tin bổ sung cho các từ. Do đó, mô hình của chúng tôi, HyperDef, một khi được huấn luyện về dữ liệu đào tạo nhiệm vụ, nhận được những kết quả mới nhất, với nhiều tiêu chuẩn.', 'bg': 'Съществуващите методи за откриване на хипернимия разчитат главно на статистиката върху голям корпус, като извличат някои съвместни модели като "животни като котки", или вграждат думи, които представляват интерес в контекст-съзнателни вектори. Следователно тези подходи са ограничени от наличието на достатъчно голям корпус, който може да обхване всички условия на интерес и да предостави достатъчно контекстуална информация, за да представи тяхното значение. В тази работа предлагаме нова парадигма за откриване на хипернимия - изразяване на значението на думата чрез кодиране на дефиниции на думата, заедно с контекстно ориентирано представяне. Това има две основни предимства: (и) Определените изречения изразяват (специфични за смисъла) независими от корпуса значения на думите, следователно подходите, ориентирани към дефиницията, позволяват силно обобщаване - след като бъде обучен, моделът се очаква да работи добре в открити тестови легла; Глобалният контекст от голям корпус и определенията предоставят допълнителна информация за думите. Следователно нашият модел, след като веднъж обучен върху задачи агностични данни, получава най-съвременни резултати в множество показатели.', 'da': "Eksisterende metoder til hypernymi detektion er hovedsagelig baseret på statistik over et stort korpus, enten udvinder nogle samtidig forekommende mønstre som 'dyr som katte' eller integrerer ord af interesse i kontekstbevidste vektorer. Disse tilgange er derfor begrænset af tilgængeligheden af et tilstrækkeligt stort korpus, der kan dække alle interessevilkår og give tilstrækkelige kontekstuelle oplysninger til at repræsentere deres betydning. I dette arbejde foreslår vi et nyt paradigme, HyperDef, til hypernymy detektion - udtrykke ordbetydning ved kodning af orddefinitioner, sammen med kontekst drevet repræsentation. Dette har to hovedfordele: (i) Definitionelle sætninger udtrykker (sansespecifikke) korpusuafhængige betydninger af ord, derfor definitionsdrevne tilgange muliggør stærk generalisering - når modellen er uddannet, forventes at fungere godt i open-domain testbeds; (ii) Global kontekst fra et stort korpus og definitioner giver supplerende oplysninger om ord. Derfor får vores model HyperDef, når den først er trænet i opgaveagnostiske data, topmoderne resultater i flere benchmarks", 'hr': "Postoje metode hipernimske detekcije oslanjaju se uglavnom na statistiku nad velikim korpusom, ili rudarstvom nekih zajedničkih obrazaca poput 'životinja poput mačka' ili uključujući riječi interesa u kontekstski vektori. Stoga su te pristupe ograničene raspoloženošću dovoljno velikog korpusa koji može pokriti sve uvjete interesa i pružiti dovoljne kontekstske informacije kako bi predstavljali njihovo značenje. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu paradigmu, HyperDef, za hipernimu otkrivanje - izražavanje riječi značenja kodiranjem definicija riječi, zajedno s kontekstskim predstavljanjem. To ima dvije glavne koristi: i) definicijske rečenice izražavaju (specifične osjećaje) nezavisnih značenja riječi, zato su pristupi na definiciji omogućili jaku generalizaciju - jednom obučenom, očekuje se da će model dobro raditi u testovima otvorenog domena; ii) Globalni kontekst od velikog korpusa i definicija pruža dodatne informacije za riječi. Stoga, naš model HyperDef, jednom obučen na podacima zadataka-agnostika, dobija rezultate stanja umjetnosti u višestrukim kriterijama", 'nl': "Bestaande methoden voor hyperniemiedetectie zijn hoofdzakelijk gebaseerd op statistieken over een groot corpus, ofwel het ontginnen van enkele co-voorkomende patronen zoals 'dieren zoals katten' of het inbedden van woorden van belang in contextbewuste vectoren. Deze benaderingen worden daarom beperkt door de beschikbaarheid van een groot genoeg corpus dat alle termen van belang kan bestrijken en voldoende contextuele informatie kan verstrekken om hun betekenis weer te geven. In dit werk stellen we een nieuw paradigma voor, HyperDef, voor hyperniemiedetectie waarbij woordbetekenis wordt uitgedrukt door woorddefinities te coderen, samen met contextgestuurde representatie. Dit heeft twee belangrijke voordelen: (i) Definitionele zinnen uitdrukken (zintuigspecifieke) corpusonafhankelijke betekenissen van woorden, vandaar dat definitiegedreven benaderingen sterke generalisatie mogelijk maken. Eenmaal getraind, zal het model naar verwachting goed werken in open-domein testbeds; (ii) Globale context uit een groot corpus en definities bieden aanvullende informatie voor woorden. Ons model HyperDef, eenmaal getraind op taakagnostische data, krijgt dan ook state-of-the-art resultaten in meerdere benchmarks.", 'ko': "기존의 초의어 검출 방법은 주로 대형 어료 라이브러리에 대한 통계에 의존하거나'공현 모델, 예를 들어'고양이 같은 동물'을 발굴하거나 관심 있는 단어를 상하문 감지 벡터에 삽입한다.따라서 이러한 방법은 충분한 어료 라이브러리의 제한을 받는다. 이런 어료 라이브러리는 관심 있는 모든 용어를 포괄하고 상하문 정보를 제공하여 그들의 의미를 나타낼 수 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 새로운 초의적 검출 모델인 HyperDef를 제시했다. 인코딩된 단어의 정의를 통해 단어의 의미와 상하문 구동의 표현을 표현했다.이것은 두 가지 주요 장점이 있다. (i) 정의문 표현(의미에 특정한)은 어료 라이브러리와 무관한 단어의 의미이기 때문에 정의 구동 방법은 강력한 범위화를 실현할 수 있다. 일단 훈련을 하면 이 모델은 개방역 테스트 플랫폼에서 잘 운행될 전망이다.(ii) 대형 어료 라이브러리에서 나온 글로벌 언어 환경과 정의는 단어에 보충 정보를 제공한다.따라서 우리 모델 HyperDef가 임무와 무관한 데이터의 훈련을 받으면 여러 기준 테스트에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻을 수 있다", 'sw': "Utawala wa kutambua umeme unategemea takwimu zaidi ya vifaa vikubwa, au kuchimba baadhi ya mitindo yanayotokea kwa pamoja kama 'wanyama kama nyama' au kuingiza maneno ya maslahi katika vectori zenye uelewa wa mazingira. Kwa hiyo mbinu hizi zimekuwa vizuizini na upatikanaji wa vifaa vya kutosha ambavyo vinaweza kuzungumzia vipengele vyote vya maslahi na kutoa taarifa za kisasa ili kuwakilisha maana yake. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza upya, HyperDef, kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa hali ya juu - kuonyesha maana ya neno kwa ufafanuzi wa maneno, pamoja na uwakilishi wa muktadha unaoendeshwa. Hii ina faida mbili muhimu: (i) hukumu za kisasa zinazoeleza (maana ya maana yenye maana yenye maana ya kibinafsi) ya maneno, kwa hiyo mbinu zinazoendeshwa na ufafanuzi inawezesha kutengeneza vizuri - kwa mara moja imefundishwa, mtindo unatarajiwa kufanya kazi vizuri katika vituo vya wazi vya ndani; (二) Mazungumzo ya Kimataifa kutoka kwenye makampuni makubwa na maelezo yanatoa taarifa muhimu kwa maneno. Kwa hiyo, mifano yetu, HyperDef, mara moja alipofundishwa kwenye taarifa za kazi, anapata matokeo ya hali ya sanaa yanasababisha bendera nyingi", 'id': "Existing methods of hypernymy detection mainly rely on statistics over a big corpus, either mining some co-occurring patterns like 'animals such as cats' or embedding words of interest into context-aware vectors.  These approaches are therefore limited by the availability of a large enough corpus that can cover all terms of interest and provide sufficient contextual information to represent their meaning.  Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan paradigm a baru, HyperDef, untuk deteksi hipernimi - ekspresi arti kata dengan mengekodikan definisi kata, bersama dengan represisi konteks. Ini memiliki dua manfaat utama: (i) kalimat definisi mengekspresikan (sens-specific) arti-independen corpus dari kata-kata, oleh itu pendekatan yang didorong definisi memungkinkan generalisasi kuat - setelah dilatih, model diharapkan bekerja dengan baik di tempat ujian domain terbuka; (ii) Global context from a large corpus and definitions provide complementary information for words.  Oleh karena itu, model kami, HyperDef, sekali dilatih pada data tugas-agnostik, mendapatkan hasil state-of-the-art dalam berbagai benchmarks", 'de': 'Bisherige Methoden der Hypernymieerkennung basieren hauptsächlich auf Statistiken über einen großen Korpus, indem sie entweder nebeneinander vorkommende Muster wie "Tiere wie Katzen" abbauen oder Wörter von Interesse in kontextbewusste Vektoren einbetten. Diese Ansätze sind daher durch die Verfügbarkeit eines ausreichend großen Korpus begrenzt, der alle Interessensgebiete abdecken und ausreichend kontextbezogene Informationen liefern kann, um ihre Bedeutung darzustellen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein neues Paradigma vor, HyperDef, zur Erkennung von Hypernymien, um Wortbedeutungen durch Codierung von Wortdefinitionen und kontextgetriebener Repräsentation auszudrücken. Dies hat zwei Hauptvorteile: (i) Definitionssätze drücken (sinn-spezifische) korpusunabhängige Bedeutungen von Wörtern aus, daher ermöglichen definitionsgetriebene Ansätze eine starke Verallgemeinerung. Nach dem Training wird erwartet, dass das Modell gut in Open-Domain-Testbeds funktioniert; (ii) Globaler Kontext aus einem großen Korpus und Definitionen liefern ergänzende Informationen zu Wörtern. Folglich erhält unser Modell HyperDef, einmal auf aufgabenunabhängigen Daten trainiert, State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse in mehreren Benchmarks', 'tr': "Öň bar hipernimi tanyşdyrma yöntemleri birnäçe büyük korpus üzerinde statistika ýaly hasaplanýar, ya da 'kediler gibi hayvanlar' ýaly birnäçe işe yarayan şekillere, ya da kontekst-tanyş vektöre gyzyklanýar sözleri girişirýär. Şonuň üçin bu golaýlary, bütün gyzyklanýar şartlaryny örtüp biljek ýeterli uly bir korpusyň ulaşabilmesi we olaryň niýetini ifade etmek üçin ýeterli contest informasiýasyny berip biler. Bu çalışmada, HyperDef'i hipernimi tanımlamak için yeni bir paradigm teklif ediyoruz. -kelime anlamını kodlamak için kelime tanımlaması ile, çevresel gösterimi ile birlikte ifade ediyoruz. Bu iki esasy täsiri bar: (i) Köpüs-hassasyz sözlerin ifade edilýän definisyonlary (hassasyz-hassasyz) köpüs-hassasyz sözlerin anlamlyklary, şol sebäpli tanımlamak üçin golaýlary güýçli döwletlendirmegi mümkin edip bilýär - bir gezek eğitildi, modeli açyk (ii) Ullakan korpus we tanyşlaryň dünýä jemgyýetli konteksti sözler üçin daňlap maglumatlary berir. Şol sebäpli, biziň modelimiz HyperDef, bir gezek task-agnostik maglumatlarda bilinmeli, sungatyň durumyny birnäçe benchmarklaryň netijesinde çykýar", 'sq': "Existing methods of hypernymy detection mainly rely on statistics over a big corpus, either mining some co-occurring patterns like 'animals such as cats' or embedding words of interest into context-aware vectors.  Këto qasje janë prandaj të kufizuara nga dispozicioni i një trupi të madh të mjaftueshëm që mund të mbulojë të gjitha termat e interesit dhe të ofrojë informacion të mjaftueshëm kontekstual për të përfaqësuar kuptimin e tyre. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një paradigm ë të re, HyperDef, për zbulimin e hiperinimisë - shprehjen e kuptimit të fjalës duke koduar përkufizimet e fjalës, së bashku me përfaqësimin e drejtuar nga konteksti. Kjo ka dy përfitime kryesore: (i) fjalët përcaktuese shprehin (specifike për sensin) kuptime të pavarura nga korpusi të fjalëve, kështu që qasjet e përcaktuara mundësojnë gjeneralizimin e fortë - sapo të trajnohet, modeli pritet të funksionojë mirë në shtretërat e testuara me domini të hapur; (ii) Konteksti global nga një korpus i madh dhe përkufizimet ofrojnë informacion komplementar për fjalët. Për shkak të kësaj, modeli ynë, HyperDef, dikur i trajnuar në të dhënat agnostike të detyrave, merr rezultate më të larta në pika të shumta", 'af': "Bestaande metodes van hipernimi-opdekking vertrou heeltemal op statistiek oor 'n groot korpus, of mining van sommige saamgebeurende patrone soos 'diere soos katte' of ingesluiting woorde van belang in konteks-bekende vektore. Hierdie toegang is daarom beperk deur die beskikbaarheid van 'n groot genoeg korpus wat alle bepalings van belang kan oordek en genoeg contextual inligting verskaf om hulle betekening te verteenwoordig. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n nuwe paradigm, HyperDef, vir hipernimi-opdekking - uitdruk woord betekening deur enkodering van woord definisies, saam met konteks gedrywe voorstelling. Hierdie het twee hoofde voordeel: i) Definitieële setings uitdruk (sens-spesifieke) korpus-onafhanklike betekenisse van woorde, daarom het definisie-gedrywe toegange sterk generalisering aktiveer - wanneer onderwerp is, word die model verwag om goed te werk in oop-domein testbedde; en (ii) Globale konteks van 'n groot korpus en definisies verskaf complementeerde inligting vir woorde. Ons model, HyperDef, een keer opgelei op taak-agnostiese data, kry state-of-the-art resultate in veelvuldige benchmarke", 'am': 'የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች በቁጥጥር ላይ በተመሳሳይ ቁጥር ላይ ይጠጋሉ፣ ወይም እንደ ‘ እንስሶች’ የሚመስል አንዳንዶችን ተሳታፊዎች ማቅረብ ወይም የተጠቃሚ ቃላትን በመስመር ማሰናከል ወደሚታወቁ መንገዶች ማቅረብ ነው፡፡ እንግዲህ እነዚህ ጥያቄዎች የጠቅላላ የጥቅም ግንኙነትን ሁሉ የሚሸፍኑ እና የጥያቄ መረጃዎችን ለማሳየት የሚችሉ ትልቅ ቆርቋዎች ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ አዲስ ፍላጎት፣ HyperDef፣ ለhypernym ማግኘት - የቃላትን መግለጫ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህ ሁለት የዋና ጥቅሞች አሉት:(i) የግልጽ ቃላት (አስተዋይ-ተጠቃሚ) የቆርፓስ-ነፃ ቃላት አነስተዋል፣ ስለዚህም የግንኙነቱ ልማድ ኃላፊነት አቀማመጥ ይችላል - አንድ ጊዜ ተማርቷል፣ ሞዴል በተከፈተ ዶሜን መክፈቻ ውስጥ መልካም ይሠራል ይመስላል፡፡ (ii) Global context from a large corpus and definitions provide complementary information for words.  ስለዚህም፣ ሞዴላታችን፣ HyperDef፣ አንድ ጊዜ በስራ-agnostic ዳታዎች ተማርቷል፡፡', 'az': "Önümüzdeki hipernim deteksiyonun metodları çox böyük korpus üstündə statistika istifadə edir, ya da 'keçilər kimi həyatlar' kimi, ya da 'keçilər kimi' kimi, ya da ünsiyyət sözlərini məlumat vektorlarına daxil edir. Buna görə də bu tərzlərin bütün məlumatlarını örtüb, məlumatlarını göstərmək üçün kifayət müxtəlif məlumatları təmin edə bilən böyük bir korpus vasitəsilə müəyyən edildi. Bu işdə, HyperDef, hipernimi keşfetmək üçün yeni bir paradigm təklif edirik - söz deməkləri kodlama vasitəsilə ifadə edirik, məlumatları təhrif edir. Bu iki ana faydası vardır: i) Nəfsil cümlələr sözlərin (hiss-təmiz) korpus-bağımsız anlamlarını ifadə edirlər, buna görə də tanımlamalı tərzlərin tərzlərini qüvvətli generalizasiya qadirdir - təhsil edildikdə, modeli açıq-domain testi yataklarında yaxşı i şləyəcəyini gözləyir; (ii) Böyük korpus və tanımlamaların küresel məlumatı sözlər üçün çoxlu məlumat verir. Beləliklə, modellərimiz HyperDef, bir dəfə task-agnostik məlumatlarında təhsil edilmiş, müxtəlif benchmarklərdə müxtəlif təhsil verilir.", 'bn': "হাইপারেনিমি আবিষ্কারের বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি মূলত একটি বড় কোর্পাসের উপর পরিসংখ্যানের উপর নির্ভর করে, অথবা 'বিড়ালের মতো প্রাণীদের কিছু সাথে সংঘর্ষ করার জন্য নির তাই এই প্রযুক্তিগুলো সীমিত, যথেষ্ট যথেষ্ট বিশাল কোর্পাসের প্রবাহের দ্বারা সীমাবদ্ধ যা তাদের মানে প্রতিনিধিত্ব কর এই কাজে আমরা একটি নতুন প্যারাডিম, হাইপার্ডিফ, হাইপার্নিমি আবিষ্কারের জন্য প্রস্তাব করি- যার মানে কোনো শব্দের সংজ্ঞার মাধ্যমে কো এই দুটি প্রধান সুবিধা রয়েছে: (i) নির্ধারিত বাক্য (অর্থ-বিশেষ) কোর্পাস-স্বাধীন বাক্য প্রকাশ করে, যার ফলে সংস্থাপন-চালানো পদ্ধতি শক্তিশালী জেনারেলেশনেশন সক্ (ii) বিশাল কোর্পাস এবং বিজ্ঞান থেকে বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের বিষয়টি শব্দের জন্য জটিল তথ্য প্রদান করে। এর ফলে আমাদের মডেল হাইপার্ডিফ, একবার কাজ-অ্যাঙ্নোস্টিক ডাটা প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছিল, সেখানে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফলাফল", 'hy': 'Հիպերնիմիայի հայտնաբերման գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները հիմնականում հիմնականում հիմնված են մեծ կորպոսի վիճակագրության վրա, կամ հանելու որոշ համատեղվող կաղապարներ, ինչպիսիք են «կենդանիներ, ինչպիսիք են կատուները», կամ ներառելու հետաքրքիր բառեր Այս մոտեցումները սահմանափակված են այնքան մեծ մարմնի հասանելիության պատճառով, որ կարող է ծածկել բոլոր հետաքրքրության տեսանկյունները և տրամադրել բավարար կոնտեքստային տեղեկատվություն իրենց իմաստը ներկայացնելու համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր պարադիգմ, ՀիպերԴֆ, հիպերնիմիայի հայտնաբերման համար, արտահայտելով բառի իմաստը՝ կոդավորելով բառի սահմանումները, միասին կոնտեքստի հիմնադրված արտահայտությունը: Սա ունի երկու հիմնական առավելություն. i) սահմանափակ նախադասությունները արտահայտում են (զգացմունքի մասնավոր) բառերի անկախ մարմնի իմաստը, այսինքն սահմանափակումների հիմնված մոտեցումները հնարավորություն են տալիս ուժեղ ընդհանուր ընդհանուր ընդհանուր ընթացքում, երբ (II) Համաշխարհային կոնտեքստը մեծ կորպոսից և սահմանումները բառերի համար համալրացող տեղեկատվություն են տալիս: Հետևաբար, մեր մոդելը ՀիպերԴեֆ-ը, երբ ուսուցանվել է խնդիրների ագնոստիկ տվյալների վրա, ստանում է ամենակարևոր արդյունքներ բազմաթիվ համեմատական նպատակներում,', 'ca': 'Els mètodes existents de detecció d\'hipernimia es basan principalment en estadístiques sobre un gran corpus, minerant alguns patrons coincidents com "animals com gats" o incorporant paraules d\'interès en vectors conscients del context. Aquests enfocaments estan, per tant, limitats per la disponibilitat d\'un corpus prou gran que pot cobrir tots els termes d\'interès i proporcionar suficient informació contextual per representar el seu significat. En aquest treball, proposem un nou paradigm a, HyperDef, per a la detecció de l\'hipernimi - expressant el significat de la paraula codificant les definicions de paraules, juntament amb la representació basada en el context. Això té dos beneficis principals: i) Les frases definicions expressen significats de paraules independents del corpus (específics del sentit), per tant, els enfocaments orientats a la definició permeten una forta generalització - una vegada entrenada, el model s\'espera que funcioni bé en cames de prova de domini obert; ii) El context global d\'un gran corpus i les definicions proporcionen informació complementar per a les paraules. En conseqüència, el nostre model, HyperDef, una vegada entrenat en dades de tasca-agnòstica, té resultats més avançats en múltiples punts de referència', 'cs': 'Stávající metody detekce hypernymií se spoléhají především na statistiky nad velkým korpusem, buď doložení některých současně vyskytujících se vzorců, jako jsou "zvířata, jako jsou kočky", nebo vložení zájmových slov do kontextových vektorů. Tyto přístupy jsou proto omezeny dostatečně velkým korpusem, který může pokrýt všechny podmínky zájmu a poskytnout dostatečné kontextové informace k reprezentaci jejich významu. V této práci navrhujeme nové paradigma HyperDef pro detekci hypernymií a vyjádření významu slova kódováním definicí slov spolu s kontextově řízenou reprezentací. To má dvě hlavní výhody: (i) Definiční věty vyjadřují (smyslově specifické) korpusově nezávislé významy slov, proto přístupy řízené definicí umožňují silnou zobecnění, protože po vytrénování se očekává, že model bude fungovat dobře v otevřených doménách; ii) Globální kontext z velkého korpusu a definice poskytují doplňkové informace pro slova. V důsledku toho náš model HyperDef, který je vyškolen na úlohově agnostických datech, dosahuje nejmodernějších výsledků ve více referenčních měřítkách', 'et': 'Olemasolevad hüpernüümia tuvastamise meetodid tuginevad peamiselt suure korpuse statistikale, kaevandades mõningaid samaaegselt esinevaid mustreid, nagu "loomad nagu kassid", või lisades huvipakkuvaid sõnu kontekstiteadlikesse vektoritesse. Neid lähenemisviise piirab seetõttu piisavalt suur korpus, mis võib hõlmata kõiki huvitingimusi ja anda piisavalt kontekstiteavet nende tähenduse kajastamiseks. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue paradigma HyperDef hüpernüümia tuvastamiseks - sõna tähenduse väljendamiseks sõnade definitsioonide kodeerimise teel koos kontekstipõhise esitusega. Sellel on kaks peamist eelist: i) definitsioonilised laused väljendavad sõnade (meelespetsiifilist) korpusest sõltumatut tähendust, mistõttu määratluspõhised lähenemisviisid võimaldavad tugevat üldistamist - kui mudel on välja õpetatud, töötab mudel eeldatavasti hästi avatud domeenilistes testivoodites; ii) Ülemaailmne kontekst suurest korpusest ja määratlused annavad sõnadele täiendavat teavet. Sellest tulenevalt saab meie mudel HyperDef, mis on pärast ülesannetega sõltumatute andmete põhjal koolitatud, kaasaegseid tulemusi mitme võrdlusnäitaja puhul.', 'fi': 'Nykyiset hypernyymin havaitsemismenetelmät perustuvat pääasiassa tilastoihin, jotka kattavat suuren korpusen, joko kaivamalla joitakin samanaikaisia kuvioita, kuten "eläimiä kuten kissoja", tai upottamalla kiinnostavia sanoja kontekstitietoisiin vektoreihin. Näin ollen näitä lähestymistapoja rajoittaa riittävän suuri kokonaisuus, joka voi kattaa kaikki kiinnostuksen kohteet ja tarjota riittävästi asiayhteyteen liittyvää tietoa niiden merkityksen kuvaamiseksi. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta HyperDef-paradigmaa hypernyymin havaitsemiseen - sanan merkityksen ilmaisemista koodaamalla sanamääritelmiä sekä kontekstipohjaista esitystä. Tällä on kaksi tärkeintä etua: (i) Definitiiviset lauseet ilmaisevat (aistispesifisiä) korpusesta riippumattomia sanojen merkityksiä, joten määritelmälähtöiset lähestymistavat mahdollistavat voimakkaan yleistymisen - kun malli on koulutettu, mallin odotetaan toimivan hyvin avoimissa testipaikoissa; (ii) Laajan korpusen ja määritelmien maailmanlaajuinen konteksti tarjoaa täydentäviä tietoja sanoista. Näin ollen HyperDef-mallimme, joka on koulutettu tehtäväagnostiseen dataan, saa huipputason tuloksia useissa vertailuarvoissa', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای موجود شناسایی hypernymy در اصل بر статистика بر روی یک کورپوس بزرگ اعتماد دارد، یا برخی از الگوهای همکاری مانند حیوانات مثل گربه\u200cها، یا کلمات علاقه\u200cای را به ویکتورهای متوجه\u200cشدن محیط می\u200cکنند. بنابراین این دسترسی ها به وسیله دسترسی یک شرکت بسیار بزرگ محدود می شوند که می تواند تمام شرایط سود را پوشاند و اطلاعات موقعیت کافی را برای نشان دادن معنی آنها ارائه دهد. در این کار، ما یک پارادیگ جدید HyperDef را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، برای شناسایی hypernymy - که به عنوان تعریف\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای رمزگذاری، همراه با نمایش\u200cهای محیط راهنمایی است. این دو سود اصلی دارد: (i) جمله\u200cهای تعریف\u200cکننده\u200cای معنی\u200cهای بی\u200cنیاز به عنوان کلمات\u200cها، که به عنوان تعریف\u200cکننده\u200cی تعریف\u200cکننده\u200cی تعریف\u200cکننده\u200cی تعریف\u200cکننده\u200cی جمعیت قوی را فعال می\u200cکند، یک بار آموزش داده شده، مدل انتظار دارد که در تختهای آ (ii) محیط جهانی از یک کورپوس بزرگ و تعریف اطلاعات اضافه\u200cای برای کلمات می\u200cدهد. بنابراین، مدل ما، HyperDef، یک بار بر اطلاعات اگنستیک کار آموزش یافته، نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنر به چندین نقشه', 'bs': "Postoje metode detekcije hipernimi oslanjaju se uglavnom na statistiku nad velikim korpusom, ili rudarstva nekih zajedničkih obrazaca poput 'životinja poput mačka' ili uključujući riječi interesa u vektore koji su svjesni konteksta. Stoga su te pristupe ograničene raspoloživošću dovoljno velikog korpusa koji može pokriti sve uvjete interesa i pružiti dovoljne kontekstske informacije kako bi predstavljali njihovo značenje. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu paradigmu, HyperDef, za hipernimu otkrivanje - izražavanje riječi značenja kodiranjem definicija riječi, zajedno s kontekstskim predstavljanjem. To ima dvije glavne prednosti: i) definicijske rečenice izražavaju (posebne osjećaje) nezavisnih značenja riječi korpusa, zato su pristupi na definiciji omogućili jaku generalizaciju - jednom obučenom, očekuje se da će model dobro raditi u testu krevetima otvorenog domena; ii) Globalni kontekst od velikog korpusa i definicija pruža dodatne informacije za riječi. Stoga, naš model HyperDef, jednom obučen na agentičnim podacima, dobija rezultate stanja umjetnosti u višestrukim kriterijama.", 'jv': 'Saihah Awak dhéwé, ngéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno ning bok dumadhi iki bakal nguasai pernik sampek kanggo awak dhéwé nggawe ngerasakno informasi kontinuhaan sampek kanggo ngerasakno winih dhéwé. In this job, we offline a new PARDlC, TypeDef, for keyboard detection - Expressing word means by koding word definetions, together with context driverepresentation. Punika diangkat sing nduwe bener kelas pangan: i) Kemerdekaan nggambar kelas (sane-kesesno) dumadhi uwong-nesaturan sing dikarepakan kelas, dadi sakjane-bisa diangkat sing apik dhéwé Generalizasi sing gak dhéwé - sapa bekar, dadi model dianggawe barang langgar sampeyan winih lanjut cara-diangkat ingkang dibuté (ii) Global context si akeh bantugan karo akeh dumadhi lan nganggelangno informasi luwih dumadhi kanggo kelas Label', 'sk': 'Obstoječe metode odkrivanja hipernimije temeljijo predvsem na statističnih podatkih v velikem korpusu, bodisi izkopavanje nekaterih sočasnih vzorcev, kot so "živali, kot so mačke", bodisi vključevanje interesnih besed v vektorje, ki se zavedajo konteksta. Ti pristopi so zato omejeni z razpoložljivostjo dovolj velikega korpusa, ki lahko zajema vse interese in zagotavlja zadostne kontekstualne informacije, ki predstavljajo njihov pomen. V tem delu predlagamo novo paradigmo HyperDef za odkrivanje hipernimije - izražanje pomena besed s kodiranjem definicij besed, skupaj s kontekstno usmerjeno reprezentacijo. To ima dve glavni prednosti: (i) definicijski stavki izražajo (smiselno specifične) pomene besed, neodvisne od korpusa, zato pristopi, ki temeljijo na definicijah, omogočajo močno posploševanje - ko je bil usposobljen, se pričakuje, da bo model dobro deloval na odprtih testnih prostorih; (ii) Globalni kontekst iz velikega korpusa in opredelitve zagotavljajo dopolnilne informacije za besede. Posledično, naš model HyperDef, ko je enkrat usposobljen za agnostične podatke za naloge, dobi najsodobnejše rezultate v več referenčnih vrednostih', 'ha': "Ana ƙayyade shiryoyi masu iya ƙayyade kan gandina surori ko kuma yana dõgara ga statistics a kan wani nau'i mai girma, ko ko ka ƙara wasu shiryoyi masu samu'a kamar 'dabbõbi' ko kuma ya shigar da maganar interesse zuwa shiryoyi masu sani. Saboda haka, waɗannan masu hanyarwa sun ƙunsa da abincin koruna mai girma wanda zai iya rufe duk rabon riba da kuma yana bãyar da maɓalli masu daidai dõmin ya gaya fassararsa. In this work, we propose a new paradigm, HyperDef, for hypernymy detection - expressing word meaning by encoding word definitions, along with context driven representation.  Wannan yana da amfani biyu masu ƙari: (i) Babu ƙayyade maganar da aka bayyana (ma'anar-hankali) cire-nau'in-faɗi masu inganci na maganar magana, saboda haka, hanyoyin da aka tafiyar da shi na zartar da mai ƙarfi - idan an sanar da shi, za'a ƙayyade in aiki mai kyau a cikin matsayin sauran-Domin; @ action: button Daga wannan, misalinmu, HyperDef, a tafiyar da shi a kan data-agnostic, yana sãmu halin-of-the-art fassarar da wasu bangon", 'he': 'שיטות קיימות לגילוי היפרנימיה תלויות בעיקר בסטטיסטיקה על קורפוס גדול, או למכרת כמה דפוסים מתרחשים יחד כמו "חיות כמו חתולים" או להכניס מילים של עניין לוקטורים מודעים לקונקסט. הגישות הללו מוגבלות על ידי זמינות של גופוס גדול מספיק שיכול לכסות את כל תנאי האינטרס ולספק מידע קונטוקטואלי מספיק כדי לייצג את המשמעות שלהם. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים פרדיגמה חדשה, היפרדף, לזהות היפרנימיה - ביטוי משמעות מילה על ידי קידום הגדרות מילים, יחד עם מייצג מונע בקשר. This has two main benefits: (i) Definitional sentences express (sense-specific) corpus-independent meanings of words, hence definition-driven approaches enable strong generalization - once trained, the model is expected to work well in open-domain testbeds;  (ii) הקשר הגלובלי של קורפוס גדול וההגדרות מספקים מידע נוסף למילים. כתוצאה מכך, המודל שלנו, היפרדף, פעם מאומן על מידע אגנוסטי משימה, מקבל תוצאות חדשות במספר נקודות', 'bo': "Existing methods of hypernymy detection mainly rely on statistics over a big corpus, or mining some co-occurring patterns like 'animals such as cats' or embedding words of interest into context-aware vectors. གནད་དོན་འདི་དག་གི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་ཐང་ཡོད་པའི་སྐོར་ཡུལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཁོངས འུ་ཅག་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་སྔར་ཕྲག་སྟོན་པའི་paradigm་གསརཔ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། This has two main benefits: (i) Definitional sentences express (sense-specific) corpus-independent meanings of words, hence definition-driven approaches enable strong generalization - once trained, the model is expected to work well in open-domain testbeds;  (ii) སྒུང་འབྲེལ་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡུལ་ཁྱད་པར་བཤད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ཡོད། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་ HyperDef, once trained on task-agnostic data, gets state-of-the-art results in multiple benchmarks"}
{'en': 'Agree or Disagree : Predicting Judgments on Nuanced Assertions', 'ar': 'أوافق أو لا أوافق: توقع الأحكام على التأكيدات الدقيقة', 'pt': 'Concordo ou Discordo: Prevendo Julgamentos sobre Asserções Nuances', 'es': 'Estar de acuerdo o en desacuerdo: predecir juicios sobre afirmaciones matizadas', 'fr': "D'accord ou pas d'accord\xa0: prédire des jugements sur des assertions nuancées", 'ja': '同意または反対：微妙な主張に対する判断の予測', 'hi': 'सहमत या असहमत: Nuanced अभिकथन पर निर्णय की भविष्यवाणी', 'zh': '可否:占断言', 'ru': 'Согласие или несогласие: прогнозирование суждений по нюансированным утверждениям', 'ga': 'Aontaím nó Easaontaím: Breithiúnais a Thuar ar Dhearbhuithe Nuálaithe', 'ka': 'მიღება ან არასწორება: წარმოდგენება წარმოდგენებული აცერტიების შესახებ', 'hu': 'Egyetértés vagy nézeteltérés: a nem megfelelő ítéletek előrejelzése', 'el': 'Συμφωνώ ή διαφωνώ: Προβλέποντας αποφάσεις για Nuanced Assertions', 'lt': 'Susitarimas arba nesutarimas: numatoma priimti sprendimus dėl branduolinio turto', 'it': "D'accordo o di disaccordo: prevedere sentenze sulle Asserzioni Nuanced", 'kk': 'Келтірілген немесе келмейді: Келтірілген аскертулер туралы тұрақтар', 'mk': 'Се согласувам или не се согласувам: предвидување на пресуди во врска со ослободените судства', 'ms': 'Setuju atau tidak setuju: Memandangkan Penghakiman mengenai Persekutuan Nuanced', 'ml': 'സമ്മതം അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അംഗീകരിക്കുക: നുയാങ്ങ് ചേര്\u200dത്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിധികള്\u200d മുന്നില്\u200d', 'mt': 'Qbil jew nuqqas ta’ qbil: Sentenzi ta’ Tbassir dwar Asserzjonijiet Nuevokati', 'mn': 'Тохиромжтой эсвэл зөрчилдөөгүй: Шүүмжлэх хэлэлцээний шийдвэр', 'pl': 'Zgadzaj się lub nie zgadzaj się: przewidywanie wyroków dotyczących nuanced assertions', 'no': 'Agree eller ikkje: Foreventar sprøytebrukar om nullerte asserteringar', 'ro': 'Sunt de acord sau nu sunt de acord: predicția hotărârilor asupra asociațiilor nuanced', 'sr': 'Slažem se ili ne slažem se: predviđajući osude o poništenim uvjerenjima', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න හෝ අසම්බන්ධ වෙන්න: නුවන් විශ්වාසය සඳහා විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්', 'so': 'Heshiiska ama heshiiska: U diyaarinta xukunka ururada naafada', 'sv': 'Överenskommer eller motsätter sig: förutsäga domar om ogiltigförklarade domar', 'ta': 'Agree or Disagree: Predicting Judgments on Nuanced Assertions', 'ur': 'موافقت یا اختلاف ہے: انکار کے بارے میں فیصلہ کرنے والے ہیں', 'vi': 'Đồng ý hay bất đồng: Định trước phán quyết về bộ phân chia ung', 'uz': 'Buyruq yoki birlashtirish: Tayyorlangan tashkilotlarni tayyorlash', 'bg': 'Съгласие или несъгласие: Предвиждане на решения по неопределени твърдения', 'nl': 'Overeenstemmen of oneens zijn: Voorspelling van vonnissen op nuanced assertions', 'id': 'Agree or Disagree: Predicting Judgments on Nuanced Assertions', 'da': 'Er enig eller uenig: Forudsigelse af domme vedrørende nuanced Assertions', 'hr': 'Slažem se ili ne slažem se: predviđajući sudbe o poništenim uvjerenjima', 'ko': '동의 또는 불동의: 미세한 단언에 근거하여 판단하다', 'de': 'Einvernehmen oder Ablehnen: Vorhersage von Urteilen über Nuanced Assertions', 'tr': 'Tuzlaşma ya da Masraf', 'af': 'Agreer of Ongeldig: voorskou oordelinge oor Nuutstandige Assensies', 'sw': 'Makubaliano au kukubaliana: Kujiandaa Jaji kuhusu Mashambulizi ya Nuanced', 'fa': 'موافقت یا اختلاف: تأخیر دادن قضاوت در مورد تأخیر ناپذیری', 'am': 'ተስማምነት ወይም ትዕዛዝ: Preparing Judges on Nuanced Assertions', 'sq': 'Marrëveshje apo mosmarrëveshje: parashikimi i gjykimeve mbi pretendimet e rritura', 'bn': 'চুক্তি বা অস্বীকার করা: নুয়াঙ্কের বিচারের প্রস্তুতি নিয়েছে', 'bs': 'Slažem se ili ne slažem se: predviđajući sudbe o poništenim uvjerenjima', 'hy': 'Համաձայնվենք կամ չենք համաձայնվում. Դադար արտահայտությունների մասին դատողություններ կանխատեսելը', 'ca': "Està d'acord o no: Predir judicis sobre asserticions avançades", 'cs': 'Souhlas nebo nesouhlas: Předpovídání rozsudků o nuanced assertions', 'az': 'Müzakirə edir ya da fərqləndirmək: Sıfırlanmış müzakirələr barəsində hökmlər təyin edir', 'fi': 'Sovi tai erimielisyys: Ennustetaan tuomioita mitättömistä lausumista', 'et': 'Nõustu või ei nõustu: otsuste prognoosimine tühistatud kinnituste kohta', 'ha': 'Agreed or Disgode: PrePredicting Jukums on Nuanced Assortions', 'sk': 'Strinjanje ali nesoglasje: napovedovanje sodb o neustreznih izjavah', 'jv': 'Suggal apa ora Ngubah: prediketeksi hukum nang assertions Nuanced', 'bo': 'agreed or Disagree: Predicting Judgments on Nuanced Assertions', 'he': 'הסכים או לא הסכימים: צפוי שיפוטים על סמכויות מעודכנות'}
{'en': 'Being able to predict whether people agree or disagree with an assertion (i.e. an explicit, self-contained statement) has several applications ranging from predicting how many people will like or dislike a social media post to classifying posts based on whether they are in accordance with a particular point of view. We formalize this as two NLP tasks : predicting judgments of (i) individuals and (ii) groups based on the text of the assertion and previous judgments. We evaluate a wide range of approaches on a crowdsourced data set containing over 100,000 judgments on over 2,000 assertions. We find that predicting individual judgments is a hard task with our best results only slightly exceeding a majority baseline, but that judgments of groups can be more reliably predicted using a Siamese neural network, which outperforms all other approaches by a wide margin.', 'ar': 'القدرة على التنبؤ بما إذا كان الناس يوافقون أو لا يوافقون على تأكيد (أي عبارة صريحة ومكتفية ذاتيًا) لها العديد من التطبيقات التي تتراوح من توقع عدد الأشخاص الذين سيحبون أو يكرهون منشورًا على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي إلى تصنيف المنشورات بناءً على ما إذا كانت متوافقة مع وجهة نظر معينة. نقوم بإضفاء الطابع الرسمي على هذا كمهمتين في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية: التنبؤ بأحكام (1) الأفراد و (2) المجموعات بناءً على نص التأكيد والأحكام السابقة. نقوم بتقييم مجموعة واسعة من الأساليب على مجموعة بيانات التعهيد الجماعي التي تحتوي على أكثر من 100000 حكم على أكثر من 2000 تأكيد. وجدنا أن التنبؤ بالأحكام الفردية هو مهمة صعبة حيث أن أفضل نتائجنا تتجاوز بشكل طفيف خط الأساس للأغلبية ، ولكن يمكن التنبؤ بأحكام المجموعات بشكل أكثر موثوقية باستخدام شبكة سيامية عصبية ، والتي تتفوق على جميع الأساليب الأخرى بهامش واسع.', 'fr': "La capacité de prédire si des personnes sont d'accord ou non avec une affirmation (c'est-à-dire une déclaration explicite et autonome) a plusieurs applications allant de la prédiction du nombre de personnes qui aimeront ou n'aimeront pas une publication sur les réseaux sociaux à la classification des publications selon qu'elles sont conformes à un point particulier de voir. Nous formalisons cela comme deux tâches de PNL\xa0: prédire les jugements de (i) individus et (ii) groupes sur la base du texte de l'affirmation et des jugements précédents. Nous évaluons un large éventail d'approches sur un ensemble de données participatives contenant plus de 100 000 jugements portant sur plus de 2 000 affirmations. Nous trouvons que la prédiction des jugements individuels est une tâche difficile, nos meilleurs résultats ne dépassant que légèrement la base majoritaire, mais que les jugements de groupes peuvent être prédits de manière plus fiable à l'aide d'un réseau neuronal siamois, qui surpasse largement toutes les autres approches.", 'es': 'Ser capaz de predecir si las personas están de acuerdo o en desacuerdo con una afirmación (es decir, una declaración explícita y autocontenida) tiene varias aplicaciones que van desde predecir a cuántas personas les gustará o no una publicación en redes sociales hasta clasificar las publicaciones en función de si están de acuerdo con un punto particular de vista. Formalizamos esto como dos tareas de PNL: predecir juicios de (i) individuos y (ii) grupos en función del texto de la afirmación y juicios anteriores. Evaluamos una amplia gama de enfoques en un conjunto de datos de colaboración colectiva que contiene más de 100 000 juicios sobre más de 2000 afirmaciones. Encontramos que predecir los juicios individuales es una tarea difícil, ya que nuestros mejores resultados solo superan ligeramente una línea de base mayoritaria, pero que los juicios de los grupos pueden predecirse de manera más confiable utilizando una red neuronal siamesa, que supera a todos los demás enfoques por un amplio margen.', 'pt': 'Ser capaz de prever se as pessoas concordam ou discordam de uma afirmação (ou seja, uma declaração explícita e autocontida) tem várias aplicações, desde prever quantas pessoas vão gostar ou não de uma postagem de mídia social até classificar postagens com base em se estão de acordo com um determinado ponto de vista. Formalizamos isso como duas tarefas de PNL: prever julgamentos de (i) indivíduos e (ii) grupos com base no texto da afirmação e julgamentos anteriores. Avaliamos uma ampla variedade de abordagens em um conjunto de dados de crowdsourcing contendo mais de 100.000 julgamentos em mais de 2.000 afirmações. Descobrimos que prever julgamentos individuais é uma tarefa difícil, com nossos melhores resultados excedendo apenas um pouco a linha de base da maioria, mas os julgamentos de grupos podem ser previstos de forma mais confiável usando uma rede neural siamesa, que supera todas as outras abordagens por uma ampla margem.', 'ja': '人々が主張に賛成するか反対するかを予測することができること（明示的で自己完結的な記述）には、ソーシャルメディアの投稿が好きか嫌いかを予測することから、特定の視点に従っているかどうかに基づいて投稿を分類することまで、いくつかのアプリケーションがあります。これを、(i)個人と(ii)グループの判断を、主張のテキストと以前の判断に基づいて予測する、2つのNLPタスクとして形式化します。私たちは、2,000以上のアサーションに関する100,000以上の判断を含むクラウドソーシングされたデータセット上の幅広いアプローチを評価します。個々の判断を予測することは難しい課題であり、最良の結果は過半数のベースラインをわずかに超えていますが、グループの判断はSiameseニューラルネットワークを使用してより確実に予測することができ、他のすべてのアプローチを大幅に上回っています。', 'hi': 'यह अनुमान लगाने में सक्षम होने के नाते कि क्या लोग किसी दावे (यानी एक स्पष्ट, आत्म-निहित बयान) से सहमत या असहमत हैं, इसमें कई अनुप्रयोग हैं जो यह भविष्यवाणी करने से लेकर हैं कि कितने लोग सोशल मीडिया पोस्ट को पसंद या नापसंद करेंगे, इस आधार पर पोस्ट को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए कि क्या वे किसी विशेष दृष्टिकोण के अनुसार हैं। हम इसे दो एनएलपी कार्यों के रूप में औपचारिक रूप देते हैं: (i) व्यक्तियों और (ii) समूहों के निर्णय ों की भविष्यवाणी करना जो दावे और पिछले निर्णयों के पाठ के आधार पर हैं। हम एक क्राउडसोर्स डेटा सेट पर दृष्टिकोणों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला का मूल्यांकन करते हैं जिसमें 2,000 से अधिक दावों पर 100,000 से अधिक निर्णय होते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि व्यक्तिगत निर्णयों की भविष्यवाणी करना हमारे सर्वोत्तम परिणामों के साथ एक कठिन काम है, जो केवल बहुमत बेसलाइन से थोड़ा अधिक है, लेकिन समूहों के निर्णय ों को एक सियामी तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके अधिक मज़बूती से भविष्यवाणी की जा सकती है, जो एक व्यापक मार्जिन से अन्य सभी दृष्टिकोणों को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Возможность предсказать, согласны ли люди с утверждением (т.е. явным, самостоятельным утверждением) или нет, имеет несколько применений, начиная от предсказания того, сколько людей понравится или не понравится пост в социальных сетях до классификации постов на основе того, соответствуют ли они определенной точке зрения. Мы формализуем это как две задачи NLP: прогнозирование суждений (i) отдельных лиц и (ii) групп на основе текста утверждения и предыдущих суждений. Мы оцениваем широкий спектр подходов на основе краудсорсингового набора данных, содержащего более 100 000 суждений по более чем 2000 утверждений. Мы обнаружили, что прогнозирование отдельных суждений является трудной задачей с нашими лучшими результатами, лишь немного превышающими базовую линию большинства, но что суждения групп могут быть более надежно предсказаны с использованием сиамской нейронной сети, которая превосходит все другие подходы с большим отрывом.', 'zh': '能占可否(即明,独陈)数应用,从占多少喜否社交媒体帖至随其合特定之类。 化其文为两NLP:以断言为本,与前断(i)私(ii)群体。 臣等于众包数据集上估其广法,该数含对2,000余断言之100,000多所断决。 臣等见人决为一剧,最胜略高于多基线,然暹罗神经网络可更可测群体,其网络过诸法远矣。', 'ga': 'Tá roinnt feidhmeanna ag baint le bheith in ann a thuar cé acu an aontaíonn nó nach n-aontaíonn daoine le dearbhú (i.e. ráiteas sainráite, féinchuimsitheach) ó thuar cé mhéad duine a thaitníonn nó nach dtaitneoidh post meán sóisialta leo go dtí postálacha a rangú bunaithe ar cibé an bhfuil siad de réir. dearcadh ar leith. Déanaimid é seo ar bhonn foirmiúil mar dhá thasc NLP: breithiúnais (i) daoine aonair agus (ii) grúpaí a thuar bunaithe ar théacs an dearbhaithe agus breithiúnais roimhe seo. Déanaimid measúnú ar raon leathan cur chuige ar thacar sonraí sluafhoinsithe ina bhfuil breis agus 100,000 breithiúnas ar bhreis is 2,000 dearbhú. Faighimid amach gur tasc crua é breithiúnais aonair a thuar agus nach sáraíonn ár dtorthaí is fearr ach bonnlíne tromlaigh, ach gur féidir breithiúnais na ngrúpaí a thuar ar bhealach níos iontaofa trí úsáid a bhaint as líonra néarach Siamese, a sháraíonn gach cur chuige eile go mór.', 'ka': 'თუ ადამიანები თავისწორებულიან თუ არა თავისწორებულიან თუ არა თავისწორებულიან თუ არა თავისწორებული, თავისწორებულიან განსხვავებული განსხვავებულიან პროგრამები, რომლებიც მხოლოდ ადამიანები მინდა თუ არა მხოლოდ სოციალური მედია პოსტის მო ჩვენ ეს როგორც ორი NLP დავაკეთებთ: i) ადამიანების და ii) ჯგუფების განსაზღვრება, რომლებიც აღმოჩენების ტექსტიდან და წინა გადაწყვეტილებების ტექსტიდან ბაზიან. ჩვენ განსაზღვრებით უფრო დიდი დახმარება მსოფლიოდ მონაცემების სხვაში, რომელიც 100 000-ზე მეტი სწორეების შესახებ 2000-ზე მეტი აცერტიების შესახებ. ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ განსაზღვრება ინდიველური განსაზღვრებები არის ძალიან რთული საქმე, რომელიც ჩვენი უკეთესი წარმოდგენება მაგრამ უფრო ცოტა უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად გა', 'el': 'Το να μπορείς να προβλέψεις αν οι άνθρωποι συμφωνούν ή διαφωνούν με έναν ισχυρισμό (δηλ. μια ρητή, αυτόνομη δήλωση) έχει πολλές εφαρμογές που κυμαίνονται από την πρόβλεψη πόσων ανθρώπων θα αρέσει ή θα αντιπαθήσει μια δημοσίευση στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης έως την ταξινόμηση των δημοσιεύσεων με βάση το αν είναι σύμφωνες με μια συγκεκριμένη άποψη. Το επισημοποιούμε ως δύο καθήκοντα: πρόβλεψη κρίσεων (i) ατόμων και (ii) ομάδων με βάση το κείμενο του ισχυρισμού και προηγούμενες αποφάσεις. Αξιολογούμε ένα ευρύ φάσμα προσεγγίσεων σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που περιέχει πάνω από 100.000 κρίσεις για ισχυρισμούς πάνω από 2.000. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η πρόβλεψη μεμονωμένων κρίσεων είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο με τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματά μας να υπερβαίνουν ελαφρώς τη βασική γραμμή της πλειοψηφίας, αλλά ότι οι κρίσεις των ομάδων μπορούν να προβλεφθούν πιο αξιόπιστα χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σιαμικό νευρωνικό δίκτυο, το οποίο ξεπερνά όλες τις άλλες προσεγγίσεις κατά μεγάλο περιθώριο.', 'hu': 'Annak megjósolása, hogy az emberek egyetértenek-e vagy nem értenek-e egyet egy állítással (vagyis egy kifejezett, önálló állítással), számos alkalmazási lehetőség van arra, hogy megjósolják, hány ember fog tetszeni vagy nem kedvelni egy közösségi média posztot, egészen a posztok osztályozásáig annak alapján, hogy azok összhangban vannak-e egy adott nézőponttal. Ezt két NLP feladatként formáljuk: az (i) egyének és (ii) csoportok ítéleteinek előrejelzése az állítás szövege és a korábbi ítéletek alapján. A megközelítések széles skáláját értékeljük egy több mint 100 000 ítéletet tartalmazó, több mint 2000 állításról szóló közösségi forrásból származó adatkészleten. Úgy találjuk, hogy az egyéni ítéletek előrejelzése nehéz feladat, a legjobb eredményeink csak kissé haladják meg a többségi értéket, de hogy a csoportok ítéleteit megbízhatóbban lehet előrejelezni egy sziámi neurális hálózat segítségével, amely minden más megközelítést nagy margóval felülmúlja.', 'it': "Essere in grado di prevedere se le persone sono d'accordo o in disaccordo con un'affermazione (cioè un'affermazione esplicita e autonoma) ha diverse applicazioni che vanno dalla previsione di quante persone gradiranno o non gradiranno un post sui social media alla classificazione dei post in base al fatto che siano in accordo con un particolare punto di vista. Lo formalizziamo come due compiti del PNL: prevedere giudizi di (i) individui e (ii) gruppi basati sul testo dell'affermazione e giudizi precedenti. Valutiamo una vasta gamma di approcci su un set di dati crowdsourcing contenente oltre 100.000 giudizi su oltre 2.000 asserzioni. Troviamo che predire i giudizi individuali è un compito difficile con i nostri migliori risultati solo leggermente superiori alla base di riferimento della maggioranza, ma che i giudizi dei gruppi possono essere previsti in modo più affidabile utilizzando una rete neurale siamese, che supera tutti gli altri approcci di un ampio margine.", 'kk': 'Адамдар қандай адамдар қандай адамдарды қалай не қалай келмейді дегенді бақылауға болады (т.е. өзіңіздің түсінікті мәліметті түсініп, қандай адамдар қандай адамдарды ұнатып, қандай адамдарды ұнатып, қандай адамдар қандай адамдарды ұнатып, қандай ад Біз бұны NLP екі тапсырмасы ретінде пішімдеуіміз: i) адамдардың және ii) топтардың шешімдерін алдыңғы шешімдерінің мәтініне негізделген. Біз көпшілік көпшілікті деректер жиынындағы көпшілік жағдайларды 2.000 көпшіліктерден арналған 100.000 көп тұратындарды бағалаймыз. Біз бөлек шешімдерді бақылау - біздің ең жақсы нәтижелеріміздің көпшілігіміздің көпшілігінен артық, бірақ топтардың шешімдері сиамезалық невралдық желі арқылы көпшілігінен артық болады. Бұл басқа жағдайларды кө', 'lt': 'Galimybė nuspėti, ar žmonės sutinka arba nesutinka su teiginiu (t. y. a i škiu, savarankišku teiginiu) turi keletą taikomųjų programų, nuo prognozės, kiek žmonių patinka ar nepatinka social in ės žiniasklaidos postui, iki klasifikavimo post ų, grindžiamų tuo, ar jie atitinka tam tikrą požiūrį. Mes tai formalizuojame kaip dvi NLP užduotis: numatomi i) asmenų ir ii) grupių sprendimai, pagrįsti teiginio tekstu ir ankstesniais sprendimais. Vertiname įvairius daugumos duomenų rinkinio metodus, kuriuose yra daugiau kaip 100 000 sprendimų dėl daugiau kaip 2 000 teiginių. Mes manome, kad atskirų sprendimų prognozavimas yra sunki užduotis, o mūsų geriausi rezultatai tik šiek tiek viršija daugumos bazinę vertę, bet kad grupių sprendimus galima patikimesniu prognozuoti naudojant Siamo nervų tinklą, kuris plačiu maržu viršija visus kitus metodus.', 'mk': 'Being able to predict whether people agree or disagree with an assertion (i.e. an explicit, self-contained statement) has several applications ranging from predicting how many people will like or dislike a social media post to classifying posts based on whether they are in accordance with a particular point of view.  Го формализираме ова како две задачи на НЛП: предвидување на пресудите на (i) поединци и (ii) групи врз основа на текстот на тврдеоето и претходните пресуди. Ги проценуваме широките пристапи на мнозински податоци кои содржат повеќе од 100.000 пресуди на повеќе од 2.000 тврдења. Најдовме дека предвидувањето на индивидуалните пресуди е тешка задача со нашите најдобри резултати само малку надминувајќи го мнозинството на основата, но дека пресудите на групите може да се предвидат со помош на сијамската нервна мрежа, која ги надминува сите други пристапи со широка маргина.', 'ms': 'Membolehkan meramalkan sama ada orang setuju atau tidak setuju dengan pernyataan (iaitu pernyataan eksplicit, yang mengandungi diri sendiri) mempunyai beberapa aplikasi yang berlainan dari meramalkan berapa ramai orang akan suka atau benci pos media sosial hingga mengklasifikasikan pos berdasarkan sama ada mereka sesuai dengan sudut pandang tertentu. Kami formalkan ini sebagai dua tugas NLP: meramalkan penilaian (i) individu dan (ii) kumpulan berdasarkan teks pernyataan dan penilaian sebelumnya. Kami menilai jangkauan luas pendekatan pada set data sumber ramai yang mengandungi lebih dari 100,000 penghakiman pada lebih dari 2,000 pernyataan. We find that predicting individual judgments is a hard task with our best results only slightly exceeding a majority baseline, but that judgments of groups can be more reliably predicted using a Siamese neural network, which outperforms all other approaches by a wide margin.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүс зөвшөөрөх эсвэл зөвшөөрөх эсэхийг тодорхойлох боломжтой байдлаар (яг л тодорхой, өөртөө дүгнэж байгаа захирал) хэдэн хүмүүс нийгмийн хэвлэлийн захирал хэрхэн дуртай, хэрхэн дуртай эсвэл дуртай байх вэ гэдгийг тодорхойлолтой ойлголтын тулд ан Бид үүнийг NLP хоёр даалгавар гэж тодорхойлж байна: i) хүн, ii) бүлгүүдийн шүүмжлэг, өмнөх шүүмжлэг дээр тодорхойлж байдаг. Бид олон нийтийн мэдээллийн бүтээгдэхүүн дээр 100,000 гаруй шүүмжтэй олон арга барилгыг 2,000 гаруй хүлээн зөвшөөрдөг. Бид хүн төрөлхтний шүүмжлээ таамаглах нь бидний хамгийн сайн үр дүн нь ихэнх суурь шугам дээр бага зэрэг илүү хэцүү гэдгийг ойлгож байна. Гэхдээ хэсэг бүлэгтэй шүүмжлээ Сиамийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглан илүү итгэлтэй байж болно. Энэ нь бусад ши', 'no': 'Å kunne foregå om folk samsvarar eller ikkje samsvarar med e in assertion (t.d. ein eksplisitt, selvkontinuert uttrykk) har fleire program frå å foregå kor mange mennesker vil like a eller ikkje ein sosiale mediepost til å klassera postar basert på om dei er i samsvar med eit spesielt visingspunkt. Vi formaliserer dette som to NLP- oppgåver: forhåndsvising av i) individuelle og ii) grupper basert på teksten av assertisjonen og førre sprøyter. Vi evaluerer ein stor rekke tilnærmingar på ein masseskortert data set som inneheld over 100 000 sprøytebrukar på over 2 000 assertingar. Vi finn at forebygging av individuelle sprøytebrukar er ein vanskeleg oppgåve med våre beste resultat berre litt enn ein fleire grunnlinje, men at sprøytebrukar av grupper kan vera betre forventa ved hjelp av eit syamesisk neuralnettverk, som utfører alle andre tilnærmingar med ein brei margin.', 'ml': 'ആളുകള്\u200d സമ്മതിക്കുകയോ ഭിന്നിക്കുകയോ ചെയ്യുന്നുണ്ടോ എന്ന് പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുവാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നുണ്ടോ (ഉദാഹരണത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രസ്താവം) എത്ര പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഇഷ്ടപ്പെടുന്നുണ്ടോ എന്നോ  നമ്മള്\u200d ഇതിനെ രണ്ടു NLP ജോലികളായി രൂപപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു: വ്യക്തികളുടെ (i) വിധികളെയും (ii) ഗ്രൂപ്പുകളെയും വ്യവസ്ഥയുടെയും മുമ്പു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d 100,000 കൂടുതല്\u200d വിധികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടായിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ക നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു വ്യക്തിപരമായ വിധികള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d കുറച്ച് മാത്രമാണെന്ന്, പക്ഷെ ഗ്രൂപ്പുകളുടെ വിധികള്\u200d വിശ്വസ്', 'mt': 'Il-kapaċità li wieħed jipprevedi jekk in-nies jaqblux jew ma jaqblux ma’ dikjarazzjoni (jiġifieri dikjarazzjoni espliċita u awtonoma) għandhiex diversi applikazzjonijiet li jvarjaw minn tbassir ta’ kemm nies se jixtiequ jew ma jixtiequx post tal-midja soċjali sa klassifikazzjoni ta’ karigi bbażati fuq jekk humiex konformi ma’ punt ta’ vista partikolari. Aħna nifformalizzaw dan bħala żewġ kompiti tal-NLP: it-tbassir tas-sentenzi ta’ (i) individwi u (ii) gruppi bbażati fuq it-test tal-affermazzjoni u s-sentenzi preċedenti. Aħna jevalwaw firxa wiesgħa ta’ approċċi fuq sett ta’ dejta crowdsourced li fih aktar minn 100,000 sentenza fuq aktar minn 2,000 dikjarazzjoni. Aħna nsibu li t-tbassir tas-sentenzi individwali huwa kompitu diffiċli bl-a ħjar riżultati tagħna biss ftit li xejn jaqbżu l-linja bażi tal-maġġoranza, iżda li s-sentenzi tal-gruppi jistgħu jiġu mbassra b’mod aktar affidabbli bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali Siamese, li jwettaq l-approċċi l-oħra kollha b’marġini wiesa’.', 'ro': 'A putea prezice dacă oamenii sunt de acord sau nu cu o afirmație (adică o declarație explicită și independentă) are mai multe aplicații, de la a prezice cât de multe persoane le va place sau nu un post social media la clasificarea postărilor în funcție de dacă acestea sunt în conformitate cu un anumit punct de vedere. Formalizăm acest lucru ca două sarcini PNL: predicția judecăților (i) indivizilor și (ii) grupurilor pe baza textului afirmației și a hotărârilor anterioare. Evaluăm o gamă largă de abordări pe un set de date crowdsourced care conține peste 100.000 de judecăți privind peste 2.000 de afirmații. Considerăm că prezicerea judecăților individuale este o sarcină grea, cele mai bune rezultate ale noastre depășind puțin valoarea de referință majoritară, dar că judecățile grupurilor pot fi prezise mai fiabil folosind o rețea neurală siameză, care depășește toate celelalte abordări cu o marjă largă.', 'pl': 'Możliwość przewidywania, czy ludzie zgadzają się lub nie zgadzają z pewnym twierdzeniem (tj. wyraźnym, samodzielnym oświadczeniem) ma kilka zastosowań, począwszy od przewidywania, ile osób spodoba się lub nie lubi postu w mediach społecznościowych, po klasyfikację postów w oparciu o to, czy są one zgodne z konkretnym punktem widzenia. Formalizujemy to jako dwa zadania NLP: przewidywanie osądów (i) osób i (ii) grup na podstawie tekstu twierdzenia i poprzednich wyroków. Oceniamy szeroki zakres podejść do zbioru danych crowdsourcingowych zawierających ponad 100.000 ocen dotyczących ponad 2.000 twierdzeń. Odkrywamy, że przewidywanie indywidualnych osądów jest trudnym zadaniem, a nasze najlepsze wyniki tylko nieznacznie przekraczają większość bazową, ale że oceny grup można bardziej wiarygodnie przewidzieć za pomocą syjamskiej sieci neuronowej, która znacznie przewyższa wszystkie inne podejścia.', 'sr': 'U mogućnosti predviđanja da li se ljudi slažu ili ne slažu sa tvrdnjivom (t.i. pojasnoj, samostalnoj izjavi) ima nekoliko aplikacija od predviđanja koliko ljudi vole ili ne vole postu društvenih medija na klasifikaciji postova na temelju toga da li su u skladu sa određenim pogledom. To formaliziramo kao dva zadatka NLP-a: predviđanje osuđenja i) pojedinaca i ii) grupa na temelju teksta uvjerenja i prethodnih osuđenja. Procjenjujemo širok niz pristupa na skupu podataka koji sadrže preko 100.000 presuda o preko 2.000 uvjeta. Nalazimo da je predviđanje individualnih osuđenja težak zadatak sa našim najboljim rezultatima samo malo preko početne linije većine, ali da osuđenja grupa može biti vjerovatnije predviđena koristeći Siamejsku neuralnu mrežu, koja iznosi sve ostale pristupe širom marginom.', 'sv': 'Att kunna förutsäga om folk håller med eller inte håller med om ett påstående (dvs ett explicit, fristående uttalande) har flera tillämpningar som sträcker sig från att förutsäga hur många människor som kommer att gilla eller ogilla ett inlägg på sociala medier till att klassificera inlägg baserat på om de överensstämmer med en viss synvinkel. Vi formaliserar detta som två NLP-uppgifter: förutsäga domar av (i) individer och (ii) grupper baserat på påståendets text och tidigare domar. Vi utvärderar ett brett spektrum av tillvägagångssätt på en crowdsourced datauppsättning som innehåller över 100 000 domar på över 2 000 påståenden. Vi finner att förutsäga individuella bedömningar är en svår uppgift med våra bästa resultat endast något över en majoritet baslinje, men att bedömningar av grupper kan förutses mer tillförlitligt med hjälp av ett siamesiskt neuralt nätverk, som överträffar alla andra metoder med en bred marginal.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සුන් සමහර විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා නැත්නම් සමහර විශ්වාස කරනවා නැත්නම් නැත්නම් නැත්නම් සමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම පොස්ට් එක්ක කැමති නැත අපි මේක NLP වැඩක් දෙකක් විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා: i) ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෝ සහ (i) කණ්ඩායම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෝ පරීක්ෂණය සහ පිළිග අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල දේවල් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල කරන්නේ. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200d අපි හොයාගන්නවා විනිශේෂ නිරීක්ෂණයක් අවශ්\u200dය වැඩක් අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප', 'ta': 'மக்கள் ஒப்புக்கொள்கிறார்களா அல்லது ஒப்புக்கொள்ள வேறுபாடு என்று புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியுமா (அதாவது, ஒரு வெளிப்படையாக, சொந்தமாக இருக்கும் கூற்று), எத்தனை மக்கள் விரும்புக நாம் இதை இரண்டு NLP பணிகளாக வடிவமைக்கிறோம்: நாம் ஒரு கூட்டத்திற்கு மேற்பட்ட 100,000 தீர்ப்புகள் உள்ள தகவல் அமைப்பில் நிறைய முறைகளை மதிப்பிட வேண்டும். தனிப்பட்ட தீர்ப்புகளை முன்வாக்குவது எங்கள் சிறந்த முடிவுகளுடன் கடினமான வேலையாகும் என்று நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம். ஆனால் குழுக்களின் விதிப்பங்கள் மிகவும் நம்பிக்', 'ur': 'اور لوگوں نے ایک مضبوطی کے ساتھ مخالفت کی یا مخالفت کی ہے (یعنی صریح مضبوطی، اپنے ساتھ رکھی ہوئی مضبوطی کے ساتھ) بہت سی کاربریاں ہیں جن کی مضبوطی سے آگاہ ہوتی ہے کہ کس قدر لوگوں کو پسند کرنا چاہیں یا ناپسند کرنا چاہیں کہ کس طرح ایک سوسیل میڈیا پوسٹ کو پسند کریں یا کسی طرح کے مطابق پو ہم نے اس کو NLP کے دو کام کے طور پر فرض کیا ہے: ایک شخص اور (i i) گروہوں کے فیصلے کی پیش آنے والی ہے جو ان باتوں اور پہلے فیصلے کے متعلق بنیاد رکھتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک گروہوں کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ 10000 مضبوط فیصلہ کرنے والے ڈیٹ سٹ پر ایک گھیرے طریقے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ فرقہ فیصلے کا پیش بینی ایک مشکل کام ہے جو ہمارے بہترین نتیجے بہت کم زیادہ ہے، لیکن یہ کہ گروہوں کے فیصلے ایک سیامی نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کے استعمال سے زیادہ مطمئن ہو سکتے ہیں، جو ایک وسیع مرز کے ذریعہ دوسری طریقوں سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتی ہے.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada in dadku ay ku heshiin karaan ama iskala qiimeyn karaan qiimeyn daahir ah (tusaale ahaan hadal cad oo quseeya) waxay leeyihiin codyo badan oo ka soo hor jeeda in dad badan jecel yihiin ama nebcaan warqada shabakadda bulshada si ay u fasaxaan boostada in ay ku qoran yihiin wadan gaar ah. Waxan waxaan u qornaa laba xafiisyada NLP: horumarinta xukunka (i) qofka iyo (ii) kooxaha ku saleysan qoraalka qiimeynta iyo xukummada hore. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa kaalmooyin kala duduwan oo ku saabsan taariikhda tirada badan oo ka badan 100,000 oo xukun ah oo ku saabsan 2,000 qiimahooda. Waxaynu aragnaa in la sii sheegayo xukunka gaarka ah waa shaqo adag, resultiyadayaga ugu wanaagsan oo ay ka sii badnaan karaan wax yar oo ka mid ah, laakiin xukunka kooxaha ayaa si aamin ah looga sii sheegi karo isticmaalka shabakadda neurada ee Siamese, kaas oo soo bandhigaya qaabab kale oo ballaadhan.', 'uz': "Bir necha odamlar qanchalik odamlar xohlanadi yoki qanchalik foydalanishini ko'rsatadi deb hisoblash mumkin. Biz buni ikkita NLP vazifalari sifatida formatlash: bir odamlar va (i i) guruhlarni tasavvur qilish va oldingi hodisalar matni asosida ishlash mumkin. Biz 2,000 dan ortiq qo'shilgan 100,000 dan ortiq xabarlarni qiymatimiz. Biz o'ylaymiz, biz bir oddiy xuddi o'zgarishni tasavvur qilish juda qiyin va eng yaxshi natijalarimiz juda ko'p darajada ko'p natijada ko'proq, lekin guruhlarning xukunalari juda ishlatiladi Siamese neural tarmoq orqali ishlatish mumkin. Bu hamma narsalarni butunlay tarmoqni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Khả năng dự đoán liệu người ta có đồng ý hay không đồng tình với một khẳng định (tức là một tuyên bố dứt khoát, tự chứa) có nhiều ứng dụng, từ việc dự đoán số người sẽ thích hay không thích một bài viết của truyền thông xã hội cho đến việc phân loại các bài viết dựa trên họ có phù hợp với một quan đi ểm cụ thể hay không. Chúng tôi thực hiện việc này như hai nhiệm vụ lập trình: dự đoán những phán xét của người cá nhân và (II) các nhóm dựa trên văn bản khẳng định và những phán quyết trước đây. Chúng tôi đánh giá một loạt các phương pháp về một bộ dữ liệu đầy tụ tập chứa hơn 100,000 phán xét hơn 2,000 tuyên bố. Chúng tôi thấy dự đoán những phán quyết cá nhân là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn với kết quả tốt nhất của chúng tôi chỉ hơi vượt quá mức cơ sở cơ bản đa số, nhưng những phán đoán của nhóm có thể được dự đoán đáng tin hơn nhờ một mạng lưới thần kinh Siamese, nó thực hiện tất cả các phương pháp khác với một khoảng cách rộng.', 'nl': 'In staat zijn om te voorspellen of mensen het wel of niet eens zijn met een bewering (dat wil zeggen een expliciete, zelfstandige verklaring) heeft verschillende toepassingen, variërend van voorspellen hoeveel mensen een bericht op social media leuk of niet leuk zullen vinden tot het classificeren van berichten op basis van of ze in overeenstemming zijn met een bepaald gezichtspunt. We formaliseren dit als twee NLP taken: het voorspellen van oordelen van (i) individuen en (ii) groepen op basis van de tekst van de bewering en eerdere oordelen. We evalueren een breed scala aan benaderingen op een crowdsourced dataset met meer dan 100.000 oordelen over meer dan 2.000 beweringen. We vinden dat het voorspellen van individuele oordelen een moeilijke taak is met onze beste resultaten slechts iets boven een meerderheidsbaseline, maar dat oordelen van groepen betrouwbaarder kunnen worden voorspeld met behulp van een Siamees neuraal netwerk, dat alle andere benaderingen met een grote marge overtreft.', 'hr': 'U mogućnosti predvidjeti da li se ljudi slažu ili ne slažu s tvrdnjivom (tj. jasno, samostalno) ima nekoliko aplikacija od predviđanja koliko će ljudi voljeti ili ne voljeti postu društvenih medija na klasifikaciji postova na temelju toga da li su u skladu s određenim pogledom. To formaliziramo kao dva zadatka NLP-a: predviđanje osuđenja i) pojedinaca i ii) grupa na temelju teksta uvjerenja i prethodnih osuđenja. Procjenjujemo širok raspon pristupa na gomilu podataka koji sadrže preko 100.000 osuđivanja o preko 2.000 uvjeta. Nalazimo da je predviđanje pojedinačnih osuđenja težak zadatak s našim najboljim rezultatima samo malo preko početne linije većine, ali da osuđenja grupa može biti vjerovatnije predviđena koristeći Siamejsku neuralnu mrežu, koja iznosi sve ostale pristupe širom marginom.', 'de': 'In der Lage zu sein vorherzusagen, ob Menschen mit einer Behauptung (d.h. einer expliziten, in sich geschlossenen Aussage) einverstanden sind oder nicht, hat mehrere Anwendungen, die von der Vorhersage reichen, wie viele Menschen einen Beitrag in sozialen Medien mögen oder nicht mögen, bis hin zur Klassifizierung von Beiträgen basierend darauf, ob sie mit einem bestimmten Standpunkt übereinstimmen. Wir formalisieren dies als zwei NLP-Aufgaben: Vorhersage von Urteilen von (i) Einzelpersonen und (ii) Gruppen basierend auf dem Text der Behauptung und früheren Urteilen. Wir evaluieren eine breite Palette von Ansätzen auf einem Crowdsourcing Datensatz, der über 100.000 Beurteilungen zu über 2.000 Assertions enthält. Wir stellen fest, dass die Vorhersage individueller Urteile eine schwierige Aufgabe ist, wobei unsere besten Ergebnisse nur geringfügig eine Mehrheitsgrundlage überschreiten, aber dass Urteile von Gruppen mit einem siamesischen neuronalen Netzwerk zuverlässiger vorhergesagt werden können, das alle anderen Ansätze um einen großen Spielraum übertrifft.', 'id': 'Being able to predict whether people agree or disagree with an assertion (i.e. an explicit, self-contained statement) has several applications ranging from predicting how many people will like or dislike a social media post to classifying posts based on whether they are in accordance with a particular point of view.  Kami formalisasi ini sebagai dua tugas NLP: memprediksi keputusan dari (i) individu dan (ii) kelompok berdasarkan teks dari pernyataan dan keputusan sebelumnya. Kami mengevaluasi jangkauan luas pendekatan pada set data sumber keramaian yang mengandung lebih dari 100.000 penghakiman pada lebih dari 2.000 pernyataan. Kami menemukan bahwa prediksi penghakiman individu adalah tugas sulit dengan hasil terbaik kami hanya sedikit melebihi dasar kebanyakan, tetapi penghakiman kelompok dapat lebih diperhatikan dengan lebih percaya menggunakan jaringan saraf Siama, yang melampaui semua pendekatan lainnya dengan margin lebar.', 'da': 'At kunne forudsige, om folk er enige eller uenige i en påstand (dvs. en eksplicit, selvstændig erklæring) har flere applikationer, der spænder fra at forudsige, hvor mange mennesker der vil kunne lide eller ikke lide et indlæg på sociale medier til at klassificere indlæg baseret på, om de er i overensstemmelse med et bestemt synspunkt. Vi formaliserer dette som to NLP-opgaver: at forudsige domme af (i) enkeltpersoner og (ii) grupper baseret på påstandens tekst og tidligere domme. Vi evaluerer en bred vifte af tilgange på et crowdsourced datasæt, der indeholder over 100.000 domme om over 2.000 påstande. Vi finder ud af, at forudsigelse af individuelle vurderinger er en svær opgave med vores bedste resultater kun lidt over et flertal basislinje, men at vurderinger af grupper kan forudsiges mere pålideligt ved hjælp af et siamesisk neuralt netværk, som overgår alle andre tilgange med en bred margin.', 'ko': '단언(즉 명확하고 포함된 성명)에 동의하는지 여부를 예측할 수 있는 다양한 앱이 있다. 얼마나 많은 사람들이 소셜미디어 댓글을 좋아하거나 싫어하는지 예측하는 것부터 댓글이 특정한 관점에 부합되는지 분류하는 것까지.우리는 이를 두 가지 NLP 임무로 형식화했다. 단언 텍스트와 이전의 판단에 따라 (i) 개인과 (ii) 단체의 판단을 예측한다.우리는 하나의 패키지 데이터 집합에서 여러 가지 방법을 평가했는데, 이 데이터 집합은 2000개의 단언이 넘는 100000개의 판단을 포함한다.우리는 개인의 판단을 예측하는 것은 어려운 임무라는 것을 발견했다. 우리의 가장 좋은 결과는 다수의 기선보다 약간 높지만, 샴페인 신경 네트워크를 사용하면 단체의 판단을 더욱 믿음직스럽게 예측할 수 있으며, 이것은 모든 다른 방법보다 매우 큰 장점을 가진다.', 'sw': 'Kuwezekana kutabiri kama watu wanakubaliana au hawakubaliana na utamko (yaani tamko baya, yenyewe na utambulisho) wana matumizi kadhaa kutoka kutabiri namna gani watu wanavyopenda au wanachukia makala ya mitandao ya kijamii ili kutangaza makala zinazohusiana na ikiwa ni kwa mujibu wa mtazamo fulani. Tunaanzisha hili kama kazi mbili za NLP: kutabiri maamuzi ya watu binafsi na (i i) kwa kutumia maandishi ya utamko na maamuzi yaliyopita. Tutathmini maeneo mengi katika seti ya taarifa zinazotumiwa na zaidi ya hukumu 100,000 juu ya matamko 2,000. Tunapata kwamba kutabiri maamuzi binafsi ni kazi ngumu yenye matokeo yetu bora zaidi kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya msingi, lakini hukumu za makundi yanaweza kutabiriwa zaidi kwa kutumia mtandao wa neura wa Siamese, ambayo inaonyesha mitazamo mengine yote kwa kiasi kikubwa.', 'fa': 'می توانند پیش بینی کنند که آیا مردم با تضمین موافقت کنند یا مخالفت کنند (یعنی یک توضیح مشخص و خودداری) چند کاربرد دارند که از پیش بینی کردن چقدر مردم دوست دارند یا ناخوش دارند یک پست رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی برای تضمین کردن پوست\u200cها بر اساس اینکه با یک نقطه مشخص هستند. ما این را به عنوان دو وظیفه NLP فرمودیم: پیش\u200cبینی دادن قضاوت فرد(ی) و (i i) گروه\u200cها بر اساس متن تضمین و قضاوت قبلی. ما یک مجموعه از نزدیک های گسترده در مجموعه داده های محلی که بیش از ۱۰۰۰ هزار قضاوت در بیش از ۲۰۰۰ اعتراض دارند ارزیابی می کنیم. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که پیش\u200cبینی داده\u200cهای فردی کار سختی است که بهترین نتیجه\u200cهای ما فقط کمی بیشتر از یک خط پایین است، ولی قانون گروه\u200cها می\u200cتوانند با یک شبکه عصبی سیامی بیشتر پیش\u200cبینی کنند که با یک مرز طولانی از همه روش\u200cهای دیگر بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'bg': 'Да можеш да предвидиш дали хората са съгласни или не с дадено твърдение (т.е. изрично, самостоятелно твърдение) има няколко приложения, вариращи от предсказване колко хора ще харесат или не харесват публикации в социалните медии до класифициране на публикациите въз основа на това дали те са в съответствие с определена гледна точка. Ние формализираме това като две задачи на НЛП: предсказване на решения на (и) физически лица и (ii) групи въз основа на текста на твърдението и предишните решения. Ние оценяваме широк спектър от подходи върху набор от данни, съдържащи над 100 000 преценки по над 2000 твърдения. Намираме, че предсказването на индивидуални преценки е трудна задача с най-добрите ни резултати само малко над базовата линия на мнозинството, но че преценките на групите могат да бъдат по-надеждно предсказвани чрез сиамска невронна мрежа, която надминава всички други подходи с широк марж.', 'af': "Om mense ooreenkomstig of nie ooreenkomstig met 'n assertie (i.e. â\x80\x99n eksplisiese, self-bevat uitdrukking) te voorskou, het verskeie toepassings vanaf die voorskou van hoeveel mense 'n sosiale mediepost wil hou of nie hou nie, om te klassifiseer pos gebaseer op of hulle ooreenkomstig met 'n bepaalde aansigpunt is. Ons formaliseer dit as twee NLP-opdragte: voorskou oordelings van i) individuele en ii) groepe gebaseer op die teks van die assertie en vorige oordelings. Ons evalueer 'n wyde omvang van toegange op 'n skakeloorspronklike data stel wat oor 100,000 oordelinge bevat oor 2,000 oordelinge. Ons vind dat individuele oordelings voorskou is 'n moeilike taak met ons beste resultate slegs klein oorskou van 'n meeste groepe basisline, maar dat oordelings van groepe meer betroubaar voorskou kan word deur 'n Siamese neuralnetwerk, wat alle ander toegange deur 'n wyde margine uitvoer.", 'sq': 'Duke qenë në gjendje të parashikojë nëse njerëzit janë dakord apo nuk janë dakord me një deklaratë (pra, një deklaratë të shprehur, të përmbajtur në vetvete) ka disa aplikime që shkojnë nga parashikimi se sa njerëz do të pëlqejnë apo nuk do të pëlqejnë një post të medias social e deri në klasifikimin e postimeve bazuar në nëse janë në përputhje me një pikëpamje të veçantë. Ne formalizojmë këtë si dy detyra NLP: parashikimi i gjykimeve të (i) individëve dhe (ii) grupeve bazuar në tekstin e deklaratës dhe gjykimeve të mëparshme. Ne vlerësojmë një gamë të gjerë metodash në një grup të dhënash me burime publike që përmban mbi 100,000 gjykime mbi mbi 2,000 pretendime. Ne zbulojmë se parashikimi i gjykimeve individuale është një detyrë e vështirë me rezultatet tona më të mira vetëm pak më tepër se një bazë e shumicës, por gjykimet e grupeve mund të parashikohen me mënyrë më të besueshme duke përdorur një rrjet nervor Siamese, i cili kryen të gjitha qasjet e tjera me një margin të gjerë.', 'hy': 'Կարող եք կանխատեսել, արդյոք մարդիկ համաձայն են կամ չեն համաձայնում փաստարկումների հետ (այսինքն, բացատրված, ինքնապահպանված փաստարկում) ունի մի քանի ծրագրեր, որոնք սկսում են կանխատեսել, թե քանի մարդ կուզենա կամ չեն սիրում սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պոստ, մինչև դասակարգում տեղեր, հիմնված այն բանի Մենք սա կազմակերպում ենք որպես երկու ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանք. i) անհատների և II) խմբերի դատողությունների կանխատեսումը, հիմնված փաստարկների և նախորդ դատողությունների տեքստի վրա: Մենք գնահատում ենք բազմաթիվ մոտեցումներ ամբողջ ժողովրդի տվյալների համակարգում, որը պարունակում է ավելի քան 100,000 դատողություն ավելի քան 2,000 հայտարարությունների վրա: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ անհատական դատողությունների կանխատեսումը բարդ խնդիր է, մեր լավագույն արդյունքները միայն մի քիչ գերազանցում են մեծամասնության հիմքը, բայց խմբերի դատողությունները կարող են ավելի վստահելի կանխատեսել սիամական նյարդային ցանցի օգտագործման միջոցով, որը ավելի լավ տարբերակով է արտադր', 'am': 'ብዙ ሰዎች እንዴት እንደሚወድዱ ወይም እንዴት እንደሚጠሉ ማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያ ፖስቲካውን በመጠቀም በመጠቀም ወይም በመጠቀም ላይ የሚጠቅሙት ፕሮግራሞች አለባቸው፡፡ ይህንን ሁለት የNLP ስራዎችን እንደምናስተካክል እና (i) ሰዎች እና (ii) ጉዳዮችን በጽሑፍ እና የቀድሞው ፍርድ ላይ በመቀበል እና በመስጠት የፍርድ ጽሑፎችን ለመቀበል እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሁለት ሺህ በላይ የሚቆጠሩ የህዝብ ዳርቻዎች የሚቆጠሩ አካባቢዎች ላይ ብዙ ደረጃዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአንዳንዱ ፍርድ መፍጠር በብዛት ውጤታችን ጥቂት ብቻ ሲበልጥ የሚችል መሆኑን እናገኛለን፤ ነገር ግን የቡድኖች ፍርድ በተለየ የሲያሜሲ ደብዳቤ መረብ በመጠቀም፣ ሁሉንም በአሰራዊ ግንኙነት የሚያደርገው ይችላል፡፡', 'bs': 'U mogućnosti predviđanja da li se ljudi slažu ili ne slažu sa tvrdnjivom (t.i. pojasnoj, samostalnoj izjavi) ima nekoliko aplikacija od predviđanja koliko će ljudi voljeti ili ne voljeti postu društvenih medija na klasifikaciji postova na temelju toga da li su u skladu s određenim pogledom. To formaliziramo kao dva zadatka NLP-a: predviđanje osuđenja i) pojedinaca i ii) grupa na temelju teksta uvjerenja i prethodnih osuđenja. Procjenjujemo širok niz pristupa na skupu podataka koji sadrže preko 100.000 osuđivanja o preko 2.000 uvjeta. Nalazimo da je predviđanje individualnih osuđenja težak zadatak sa našim najboljim rezultatima samo malo preko početne linije većine, ali da osuđenja grupa može biti vjerovatnije predviđena koristeći Siamejsku neuralnu mrežu, koja iznosi sve ostale pristupe širom marginom.', 'az': 'İnsanların müzakirə etdiyini və ya müzakirə etdiyini təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin edə biləcəkləri təmin tə Biz bunu NLP vəzifəsi kimi formalizəyirik: i) kişilərin və ii) qrupların hökmlərini təmin edirik, əvvəlki hökmlərin metinə dayanan. Biz 2000-dən artıq iddiasında 100.000-dən artıq hökm verilən qüvvətli məlumat qurmasında çox müxtəlif tərəflər təşkil edirik. Bizim ən yaxşı sonuçlarımız yalnız çoxluğunun baseline üstündən çox çətinlikdir, amma qrupların hökmləri Siamlı nöral a ğ vasitəsilə daha güvenilir tədbir edilə bilər ki, bütün başqa tədbirləri genişliyi tərəfind ən üstün edər.', 'tr': 'Adamlar bir gürrüň bilen ylalaşyp ýa-da ylalaşyp bilmeýäni täze tahmin edip bilmeýänler(diýmek bolsa, özüniň bar-da) näçe adamyň näçe adamlaryň halandygyny ýa-da sosyal medýýasynyň post-yny bejermek islemeýändigini täzeden a ýdyp bilmeýändiklerini täzeden aýdyp bilýärler. Muny NLP üçin iki zady diýip formalýarys: i) adamlaryň we (ii) toparlaryň sözleriniň we öňki hökümleriniň metinine daýanýan aýdymlaryny tahmin etmek. Biz köpürli maglumatlar arasynda 100,000 üstünde ikram etýän bir ýagdaý golaýyny çykýarys. Birnäçe kararlaryny öňden geçirmek biziň iň gowy netijelerimizde diňe köp esasy çyzgynyň üstünde bir kyndyr, ýöne toparlaryň kararlaryny Siamese neural şebekeni ulanmakdan has ynamly tahmin edilip bilýäris. Bu ýagdaýyň hemme ýagdaýyny örän uly çyzgynyň üstüne getirip bilýär.', 'et': 'Võimalus ennustada, kas inimesed nõustuvad väitega või mitte nõustuvad (st selge, iseseisev avaldus) on mitmeid rakendusi alates sellest, kui paljudele inimestele meeldib või ei meeldi sotsiaalmeedia postitus, kuni postituste klassifitseerimiseni vastavalt konkreetsele seisukohale. Formaliseerime selle kahe NLP ülesandena: i) üksikisikute ja ii) rühmade otsuste prognoosimine väite ja varasemate kohtuotsuste teksti alusel. Hindame mitmesuguseid lähenemisviise ühiskogumile, mis sisaldab üle 100 000 kohtuotsuse üle 2000 väite. Me leiame, et individuaalsete otsuste prognoosimine on raske ülesanne, meie parimad tulemused ületavad vaid veidi enamuse algväärtust, kuid et rühmade otsuseid saab usaldusväärsemalt prognoosida Siiami närvivõrgu abil, mis ületab kõik teised lähenemisviisid laialt.', 'fi': 'Pystymällä ennustamaan, ovatko ihmiset samaa mieltä tai eri mieltä väitteestä (eli nimenomaisesta, itsenäisestä lausunnosta) on useita sovelluksia, jotka vaihtelevat siitä, kuinka moni ihminen pitää tai ei pidä sosiaalisen median julkaisusta, viestien luokitteluun sen perusteella, ovatko ne tietyn näkökulman mukaisia. Muodostamme tämän kaksi NLP:n tehtävää: i) yksilöiden ja ii) ryhmien tuomioiden ennustaminen väitteen tekstin ja aiempien tuomioiden perusteella. Arvioimme monenlaisia lähestymistapoja joukkolähdeaineistossa, joka sisältää yli 100 000 tuomiota yli 2 000 väitteestä. Havaitsemme, että yksittäisten arviointien ennustaminen on vaikea tehtävä, ja parhaat tulokset ylittävät vain hieman enemmistölähtökohdan, mutta ryhmien arvioinnit voidaan ennustaa luotettavammin siamilaisella neuroverkolla, joka ylittää kaikki muut lähestymistavat laajalti.', 'bn': 'মানুষ একটি বিশেষ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি অনুযায়ী পোস্টগুলোর উপর ভিত্তিক পোস্টগুলোকে বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিতে বিশেষ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে বিভিন্ন পোস্ট বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তি আমরা এটাকে দুই এনএলপি কাজ হিসেবে বিন্যাস করি: প্রতিবাদ এবং পূর্ববর্তী বিচারের উপর ভিত্তিতে বিবাদের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করি। আমরা দুই হাজারের বেশি বিচারের বিভিন্ন প্রতিক্রিয়া মূল্যায়ন করি জনসূত্রের তথ্য সেটে যার মধ্যে ১০০,০০০ বিচার রয়েছে। আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে ব্যক্তিগত বিচারের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী হচ্ছে আমাদের সেরা ফলাফল শুধুমাত্র সংখ্যাগরিষ্ঠ সংখ্যাগরিষ্ঠের বেসাইলাইনের কিছুটা বেশী কঠিন, কিন্তু এই বিচা', 'ca': "Ser capaç de predir si la gent està d'acord o no amb una afirmació (és a dir, una afirmació explícita i autocontínua) té diverses aplicacions que van des de predir quantes persones agradarà o no un post de mitjans socials fins a classificar posts basats en si estan d'acord amb un punt de vista particular. We formalize this as two NLP tasks: predicting judgments of (i) individuals and (ii) groups based on the text of the assertion and previous judgments.  Evaluam una gran varietat d'enfocaments en un conjunt de dades d'origen multiple que contenia més de 100.000 judicis en més de 2.000 afirmacions. Trobem que predir judicis individuals és una tasca difícil amb els nostres millors resultats només una mica més enllà d'una base de referència majoritària, però que els judicis de grups poden ser predits de manera més fiable fent servir una xarxa neuronal siamese, que supera tots els altres enfocaments amb un gran marge.", 'cs': 'Možnost předpovědět, zda lidé souhlasí nebo nesouhlasí s tvrzením (tj. explicitním, samostatným prohlášením) má několik aplikací, od předpovědi, kolik lidí se bude líbit nebo nelíbit příspěvek na sociálních sítích až po klasifikaci příspěvků na základě toho, zda jsou v souladu s konkrétním pohledem. Formalizujeme to jako dva NLP úkoly: predikci úsudků (i) jednotlivců a (ii) skupin na základě textu tvrzení a předchozích rozsudků. Hodnotíme širokou škálu přístupů na crowdsourcingové datové sadě obsahující více než 100.000 úsudků ohledně tvrzení více než 2.000. Zjišťujeme, že předpověď jednotlivých úsudků je těžký úkol, kdy naše nejlepší výsledky jen mírně překračují většinovou základnu, ale že hodnocení skupin lze spolehlivěji předpovědět pomocí siamské neuronové sítě, která všechny ostatní přístupy značně předčuje.', 'jv': 'Yo wis dipurangke karo nganggep sampeyan apa or a, nik nggabunge sampeyan ambekan karo perusahaan winih (i.e. dadi kapan-kapan ingkang dipulang sampeyan) sak aplikasi sing dipulang sampeyan karo akeh liyane sing arep diangsudan karo cah papan media sampeyan sak tau dadi kapan podho susahe sak ora dianggap. Awak dhéwé ngerdiwangi iki nggawe NLP iki: kelebanjuré ngerasah barang (i) perbudhakan lan (i i) nggawe barang kelompok nggawe Kemerdekaan karo kelompok sing katêpakan karo hal karang apik. Awak dhéwé éntukno akeh dolanan sing dibutèh kanggo kalaha gambar dadi neng dong sing katok 1.000, nggawe barang kanggo kalah 2.000 Awak dhéwé éngak perusahaan hukum sing gak adalah iki dadi kaé diolah ning awak dhéwé butawak dhéwé éngak dhéwé uga dhéwé, mengko iso nggawe geraksi hukum nggawe geraksi uwong sing beraksi tambah nêr Siamé, sing veAwak dhéwé susahé awak dhéwé nyong mandeh apik gedhé.', 'ha': "Ina iya iya ƙayyade ko kuwa mutane sun yarda da su yarda da wani magana (misali, magana mai bayyanawa da kanzu) yana da wasu shiryoyin ayuka masu tsakanin basĩra da yawa mutane zã su yarda ko kuma su ƙi wani makala na mitandawa jamii dõmin su rarraba posten a kan karatun da su ba da wani point na ƙayyade. Mu dangane wannan kamar aikin NLP biyu: Ana yi bayani ga umarnin (mutane) da jama'a (i i) a kan littãfin maganar da masu gabanin. Ana ƙaddara koɓa masu yawa a kan mutane da aka haɗa data na ƙaranci, yana da akan mutane 100,000 a kan bayani 2,000. Muna gane cewa an yi bayani ga masu hukuncin guda ni'a mai tsananin aikin mu da matsayinmu masu ƙara kaɗan ne mafi ƙaranci a ƙarami, kuma amma cewa masu mutane na ƙungiyõyi za'a iya amintarwa da yawa a yi amfani da wani shirin neural na Siamese, wanda ke sami duk mataimaki na dabam na sami.", 'sk': 'Zmožnost predvidevanja, ali se ljudje strinjajo ali se ne strinjajo z izjavo (tj. eksplicitno, samostojno izjavo), ima več aplikacij, od napovedovanja, koliko ljudi bo všeč ali ne bo všeč objava v družbenem omrežju, do razvrščanja objav glede na to, ali so v skladu z določenim stališčem. To formaliziramo kot dve nalogi NLP: napovedovanje sodb (i) posameznikov in (ii) skupin na podlagi besedila trditve in prejšnjih sodb. Ocenjujemo širok spekter pristopov na množičnem naboru podatkov, ki vsebuje več kot 100.000 sodb o več kot 2.000 trditvah. Ugotavljamo, da je napovedovanje posameznih sodb težka naloga, saj naši najboljši rezultati le nekoliko presegajo osnovno vrednost večine, vendar je presoje skupin mogoče zanesljiveje napovedati z uporabo siamskega živčnega omrežja, ki za široko maržo presega vse ostale pristope.', 'bo': 'མི་མང་གིས་མཐུན་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་ཐུབ་པ་ལས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་གཞན་ཅིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་NLP་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་མཉམ་ཚང་མས་བསམ་བཤེར་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མིག ང་ཚོའི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲས་འདོད་པ་དེ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་བྱ་རིམ་གཅིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཅིག་ལས་ཕར་ཆེ་བའི་གཞི་རྩིས་ཡོད་ཅིག་ཡིན་ནའང་། བྱ་ཚིག་རྩོམ་ཁབ་གྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་', 'he': 'להיות מסוגל לחזות אם אנשים מסכימים או לא מסכימים עם הצהרה (כלומר הצהרה ברורה, מכילה בעצמו) יש כמה שימושים שמגיעים מלחיזות כמה אנשים יאהבו או לא יאהבו פוסט תקשורת חברתית We formalize this as two NLP tasks: predicting judgments of (i) individuals and (ii) groups based on the text of the assertion and previous judgments.  אנו מעריכים מגוון רחב של גישות על קבוצת נתונים מקורות קהל שמכילה מעל 100,000 שיפוטים על מעל 2,000 הצהרות. אנו מוצאים שצפוי שיפוטים בודדים הוא משימה קשה עם התוצאות הטובות ביותר שלנו רק מעט מעבר לרוב המרכזים, אבל ששיפוטים של קבוצות יכולים לצפות באופן אמין יותר באמצעות רשת עצבית סיאמית, אשר מפעילה את כל גישות אחרות על ידי גבול רחב.'}
{'en': 'Measuring Frame Instance Relatedness', 'fr': 'Relation entre les instances de cadre de mesure', 'es': 'Medición de la relación de la instancia del marco', 'ar': 'قياس ارتباط مثيل الإطار', 'pt': 'Medindo a relação da instância do quadro', 'zh': '量帻实例相关性', 'ja': 'フレームインスタンス関連性の測定', 'hi': 'फ़्रेम इंस्टेंस संबद्धता को मापना', 'ru': 'Связанность экземпляра измерительного кадра', 'ga': 'Comhghaolmhaireacht an Fhráma Tomhais', 'ka': 'ფემის ინსტანსის შესახებ', 'el': 'Μέτρηση συσχέτισης παρουσίας πλαισίου', 'hu': 'A keretpéldány kapcsolatának mérése', 'it': 'Misurare la relazione tra istanze quadro', 'kk': 'Фрейм инстанциясын өлшеу', 'lt': 'Ryšių su rėmo instancija matavimas', 'mk': 'Одмерување на врска со инстанцијата на рамка', 'ms': 'Measuring Frame Instance Relatedness', 'mt': 'Measuring Frame Instance Relatedness', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെയിം ഇന്\u200dസ്റ്റെന്\u200dസ് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d അളന്നുകൊടുക്കുക', 'mn': 'Фрейм инстанц хамааралтай хэмжээст', 'no': 'Målar ramme- instansrelasjon', 'pl': 'Powiązanie instancji ramki pomiarowej', 'ro': 'Măsurarea relației instanțelor cadrului', 'sr': 'Mjerenje okvirnog instanca povezanosti', 'si': 'ෆ්\u200dරේම් ස්ථානය සම්බන්ධතා', 'sv': 'Mät raminstansrelation', 'so': 'Heshiiska iskuulka', 'ta': 'சட்டத்தின் உருவாக்கு தொடர்புகளை அளவிடு', 'ur': 'فرم انٹنسس مرتبہ', 'uz': 'Freymning oÊṠlchamini oÊṠzgartirish', 'vi': 'Sự liên quan đến khung', 'bg': 'Измерване на връзката на инстанцията на рамката', 'da': 'Måling af rammeinstansrelation', 'nl': 'Verwantheid van Frame Instance meten', 'hr': 'Mjerenje povezanosti s instancom okvira', 'id': 'Mengukur hubungan Instansi Bingkai', 'de': 'Beziehungsgrad der Frame-Instanz messen', 'fa': 'مقدار مرتبط فصل چشمه', 'ko': '프레임 인스턴스 연관도 측정', 'tr': 'Çerçi durmuşy baglanmasy', 'sw': 'Kupima Uhusiano wa Uchumo', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Measuring Frame Instance Relatedness', 'hy': 'Օրինակի ինտենցիայի հարաբերությունը չափելը', 'af': 'Maat Raam Instans Relatiteit', 'az': '쎇敲즙洠䥮獴慮揄넠쒰汩얟歩汩摩爊', 'bn': 'ফ্রেম ইনস্টেন্স সংযোগ মাপ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Mjerenje okvirnog instanca povezanosti', 'ca': 'Mésurar la relació entre les instancies del marc', 'et': 'Raami eksemplari seose mõõtmine', 'cs': 'Souvislost instance měřícího rámce', 'fi': 'Kehyksen instanssin yhteyden mittaaminen', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Merjenje povezanosti primerkov okvirja', 'he': 'מידוד קשר מקרה מערכת', 'bo': 'ཕྲང་གཞུང་ལ་གནས་སྟངས་སྐྱེལ་ཚད་ཚད'}
{'en': 'Frame semantics is a well-established framework to represent the meaning of natural language in computational terms. In this work, we aim to propose a quantitative measure of relatedness between pairs of frame instances. We test our method on a dataset of sentence pairs, highlighting the correlation between our metric and human judgments of semantic similarity. Furthermore, we propose an application of our measure for clustering frame instances to extract prototypical knowledge from natural language.', 'es': 'La semántica de marcos es un marco bien establecido para representar el significado del lenguaje natural en términos computacionales. En este trabajo, nuestro objetivo es proponer una medida cuantitativa de la relación entre pares de instancias de fotogramas. Probamos nuestro método en un conjunto de datos de pares de oraciones, destacando la correlación entre nuestros juicios métricos y humanos de similitud semántica. Además, proponemos una aplicación de nuestra medida para agrupar instancias de marcos para extraer el conocimiento prototípico del lenguaje natural.', 'ar': 'تعد دلالات الإطار إطارًا راسخًا لتمثيل معنى اللغة الطبيعية في المصطلحات الحسابية. في هذا العمل ، نهدف إلى اقتراح مقياس كمي للعلاقة بين أزواج من مثيلات الإطار. نحن نختبر طريقتنا على مجموعة بيانات من أزواج الجمل ، مع إبراز العلاقة بين أحكامنا المترية والبشرية للتشابه الدلالي. علاوة على ذلك ، نقترح تطبيقًا لمقياسنا لتجميع مثيلات الإطار لاستخراج المعرفة النموذجية من اللغة الطبيعية.', 'pt': 'A semântica de quadros é uma estrutura bem estabelecida para representar o significado da linguagem natural em termos computacionais. Neste trabalho, pretendemos propor uma medida quantitativa de parentesco entre pares de instâncias de quadros. Testamos nosso método em um conjunto de dados de pares de frases, destacando a correlação entre nossa métrica e julgamentos humanos de similaridade semântica. Além disso, propomos uma aplicação de nossa medida para clustering de instâncias de frame para extrair conhecimento prototípico da linguagem natural.', 'fr': "La sémantique des trames est un cadre bien établi pour représenter la signification du langage naturel en termes informatiques. Dans ce travail, nous visons à proposer une mesure quantitative de la relation entre des paires d'instances de trame. Nous testons notre méthode sur un ensemble de paires de phrases, mettant en évidence la corrélation entre notre métrique et les jugements humains de similitude sémantique. En outre, nous proposons une application de notre mesure pour le clustering d'instances de trames afin d'extraire des connaissances prototypiques du langage naturel.", 'ja': 'フレーム意味論は、計算用語で自然言語の意味を表すための十分に確立されたフレームワークである。この研究では、フレームインスタンスのペア間の関連性の定量的尺度を提案することを目指しています。私たちは文のペアのデータセットでメソッドをテストし、意味的類似性の指標と人間の判断の間の相関関係を強調します。さらに、自然言語から原型知識を抽出するためのフレームインスタンスをクラスタリングするためのメジャーの適用を提案します。', 'ru': 'Семантика фреймов - это прочно укоренившаяся структура для представления значения естественного языка в вычислительных терминах. В этой работе мы стремимся предложить количественную меру взаимосвязи между парами экземпляров кадров. Мы тестируем наш метод на наборе данных пар предложений, подчеркивая корреляцию между нашими метрическими и человеческими суждениями о семантическом сходстве. Кроме того, мы предлагаем применение нашей меры для кластеризации экземпляров кадров для извлечения прототипических знаний из естественного языка.', 'zh': '框架语义学者,善框架也,以计算术语示自然语言之义也。 于此之中,指一实相关性之量。 试我以数集上,出我度人语义相似性之相关性。 又议宜用我度量聚类帻例,以取原型于自然语言。', 'hi': 'फ्रेम शब्दार्थ कम्प्यूटेशनल शब्दों में प्राकृतिक भाषा के अर्थ का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए एक अच्छी तरह से स्थापित ढांचा है। इस काम में, हम फ्रेम उदाहरणों के जोड़े के बीच संबंधितता के मात्रात्मक उपाय का प्रस्ताव करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। हम वाक्य जोड़े के डेटासेट पर अपनी विधि का परीक्षण करते हैं, हमारे मीट्रिक और शब्दार्थ समानता के मानव निर्णयों के बीच सहसंबंध को उजागर करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम प्राकृतिक भाषा से प्रोटोटाइपिकल ज्ञान निकालने के लिए क्लस्टरिंग फ्रेम उदाहरणों के लिए हमारे उपाय के एक आवेदन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Is creat seanbhunaithe é fráma shéimeantaic chun brí na teanga nádúrtha a léiriú i dtéarmaí ríomhaireachtúla. San obair seo, tá sé d’aidhm againn tomhas cainníochtúil a mholadh den ghaolmhaireacht idir frámaí frámaí. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár modh ar thacar sonraí de phéirí abairtí, ag cur béime ar an gcomhghaol idir ár mbreithiúnas méadrach agus daonna ar chosúlacht shéimeantach. Ina theannta sin, molaimid ár mbeart a chur i bhfeidhm chun cásanna fráma a bhraisliú chun eolas fréamhshamhla a bhaint as teanga nádúrtha.', 'ka': 'პარამეტრი სმენტიკი კარგი დააყენებული ფრამეტრი, რომელიც კომპუტაციალური სიტყვის ნიშნავს. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მინდომით წარმოდგინოთ კონტაქტიური განმავლობის განმავლობა ფრამების განმავლობაში. ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ჩვენი მეთოდის მონაცემების კომპორტებით, რომელიც ჩვენი მეტრიკური და ადამიანის სწორეობის კომპორეციაზე გადაწყვება. დამატებით, ჩვენ მინდა ჩვენი მოწყობილობას კლასტერებისთვის კლასტერებისთვის კლასტერებისთვის პროტიპური მეცნიერების გამოყენება, რომელიც ჩვენი მოწყო', 'el': 'Η σημασιολογία πλαισίων είναι ένα καθιερωμένο πλαίσιο για την αναπαράσταση της έννοιας της φυσικής γλώσσας με υπολογιστικούς όρους. Στην παρούσα εργασία, στοχεύουμε να προτείνουμε ένα ποσοτικό μέτρο συσχέτισης μεταξύ ζευγαριών περιπτώσεων πλαισίου. Δοκιμάζουμε τη μέθοδο μας σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων ζευγαριών προτάσεων, αναδεικνύοντας τη συσχέτιση μεταξύ των μετρικών και ανθρώπινων κρίσεων σημασιολογικής ομοιότητας. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε μια εφαρμογή του μέτρου μας για την ομαδοποίηση περιπτώσεων πλαισίων για την εξαγωγή πρωτοτυπικής γνώσης από τη φυσική γλώσσα.', 'hu': 'A keretszemetika egy jól megalapozott keret, amely a természetes nyelv jelentését számítástechnikai szempontból képviseli. Ebben a munkában a keretek párjai közötti kapcsolatok mennyiségi mértékét kívánjuk javasolni. Módszerünket mondatpárokból álló adatkészleten teszteljük, kiemelve a szemantikai hasonlóság metrikus és emberi megítéléseink közötti korrelációt. Továbbá javasoljuk intézkedésünk alkalmazását a keretpéldányok klaszterezésére a természetes nyelvből való prototípusos ismeretek kivonására.', 'lt': 'Ramių semantika yra gerai sukurta sistema, kuri atspindi gamtos kalbos reikšmę skaičiavimo požiūriu. Šiame darbe siekiame pasiūlyti kiekybinį tarpusavio ryšio tarp dviejų rėmų atvejų matavimą. We test our method on a dataset of sentence pairs, highlighting the correlation between our metric and human judgments of semantic similarity.  Be to, siūlome taikyti savo priemonę, skirtą grupuoti pagrindų pavyzdžius, kad prototipinės žinios būtų išgautos iš natūralios kalbos.', 'it': "La semantica dei frame è un framework consolidato per rappresentare il significato del linguaggio naturale in termini computazionali. In questo lavoro, miriamo a proporre una misura quantitativa della relazione tra coppie di istanze frame. Testiamo il nostro metodo su un set di dati di coppie di frasi, evidenziando la correlazione tra i nostri giudizi metrici e umani di somiglianza semantica. Inoltre, proponiamo un'applicazione della nostra misura per il clustering di istanze frame per estrarre conoscenze prototipali dal linguaggio naturale.", 'kk': 'Фрейм семантика - математикалық терминлерде табиғи тілдің мағынасын көрсету үшін жақсы құрылған фрейм. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз фреймдер инстанциясының арасындағы қатынастығының сантық өлшемін келтіруге мақсатымыз. Біз метрикалық және адамдардың семантикалық ұқсас тәртіптерінің арасындағы деректер жиынын тексереміз. Қосымша, біз табиғи тілден прототипиялық білім тарқату үшін қолданбаларымызды қолдануға ұсындық.', 'mk': 'Семантиката на рамките е добро воспоставена рамка која го претставува значењето на природниот јазик во компјутерски термини. In this work, we aim to propose a quantitative measure of relatedness between pairs of frame instances.  Го тестираме нашиот метод на податоци од парови на реченици, истакнувајќи ја корелацијата помеѓу нашите метрички и човечки пресуди за семантична сличност. Покрај тоа, предложуваме апликација на нашата мерка за групирање на инстанции на рамки за извлекување прототипично знаење од природниот јазик.', 'ms': 'Semantik bingkai adalah kerangka yang ditetapkan dengan baik untuk mewakili makna bahasa alami dalam terma pengiraan. Dalam kerja ini, kami bertujuan untuk melamar ukuran kuantitatif hubungan antara pasangan contoh bingkai. Kami menguji kaedah kami pada set data pasangan kalimat, menyatakan korelasi antara penghakiman metrik dan manusia tentang persamaan semantik. Furthermore, we propose an application of our measure for clustering frame instances to extract prototypical knowledge from natural language.', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെയിം സെമാന്റിക്സ് ഒരു നല്ല സ്ഥാപിതമായ ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്കാണ്. അതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം കണക്കൂട്ടുകണക്കില്\u200d സ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത് രണ്ട് ഫ്രെയിമിനുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഒരു കൂട്ടം  നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ രണ്ടു ജോട്ടുകാരെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന രീതി അതിനുശേഷം, സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രോട്ടോട്ടിക്കല്\u200d പരിജ്ഞാനം പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ അളവിലുള്ള ഒരു പ്', 'mt': 'Is-semantika tal-qafas hija qafas stabbilit sew biex tirrappreżenta t-tifsira tal-lingwa naturali f’termini komputattivi. In this work, we aim to propose a quantitative measure of relatedness between pairs of frame instances.  Aħna ntestjaw il-metodu tagħna fuq sett ta’ dejta ta’ pari ta’ sentenzi, li jenfasizzaw il-korrelazzjoni bejn is-sentenzi metriċi tagħna u dawk umani ta’ similarità semantika. Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu applikazzjoni tal-miżura tagħna għall-raggruppament ta’ każijiet ta’ qafas biex l-għarfien prototipiku jiġi estratt mil-lingwa naturali.', 'mn': 'Фрейм семантик бол тооцооллын хэлбэрээр байгалийн хэлний утгыг илэрхийлэх сайн байгуулсан фрэйм юм. Энэ ажлын тулд бид хэмжээний хэмжээний харилцааны тоо хэмжээг дэвшүүлэхэд зориулсан. Бид өөрсдийгөө өгөгдлийн хэлбэр дээр шалгаж, метрик болон хүн төрөлхтний зэрэгцээ төрөлхтний холбоотой байдлыг тодорхойлдог. Үүнээс гадна бид байгалийн хэлээс прототипик мэдлэгийг авахын тулд хэмжээний хэмжээний хэрэглээ зөвлөж байна.', 'no': 'Rammesemantikk er eit godt oppretta rammeverk som representerer betydningen av naturspråk i datamaskina. I dette arbeidet må vi foreslå eit kvantitativ mål av relateten mellom par av rammeinstansar. Vi tester metoden vårt på ein dataset med setningar par, og markerer korrelasjonen mellom våre metriske og menneske sprøytebrukar av semantiske likhet. I tillegg foreslår vi eit program på målet våre for å gruppere rammeinstansar for å pakka ut prototypisk kunnskap frå naturspråk.', 'pl': 'Semantyka ramek jest dobrze ugruntowanym frameworkiem reprezentującym znaczenie języka naturalnego w kategoriach obliczeniowych. W niniejszej pracy chcemy zaproponować ilościową miarę powiązania między parami instancji ramowych. Testujemy naszą metodę na zbiorze danych par zdań, podkreślając korelację między naszymi ocenami metrycznymi i ludzkimi podobieństwa semantycznego. Ponadto proponujemy zastosowanie naszego środka do klastrowania instancji ramowych w celu wydobycia prototypowej wiedzy z języka naturalnego.', 'sr': 'Frame semantika je dobro uspostavljen okvir da predstavlja smisao prirodnog jezika u računalnim terminima. U ovom poslu ciljamo predložiti kvantitativnu mjeru odnosa između parova okvirnih slučajeva. Testiramo našu metodu na setu podataka par rečenica, naglašavajući korelaciju između naših metričkih i ljudskih sudova o semantičkoj sličnosti. Osim toga, predlažemo primjenu naše mjere za skupljanje okvirnih slučajeva da izvučemo prototipično znanje iz prirodnog jezika.', 'ro': 'Sematica cadrului este un cadru bine stabilit pentru a reprezenta semnificația limbajului natural în termeni computaționali. În această lucrare, ne propunem o măsură cantitativă a relației între perechi de instanțe de cadru. Testăm metoda pe un set de date de perechi de propoziții, evidențiind corelația dintre judecățile noastre metrice și umane de similitudine semantică. În plus, propunem aplicarea măsurii noastre pentru clusterizarea instanțelor cadre pentru extragerea cunoștințelor prototipice din limbajul natural.', 'sv': 'Ramsemantik är ett väletablerat ramverk för att representera innebörden av naturligt språk i beräkningsmässiga termer. I detta arbete syftar vi till att föreslå ett kvantitativt mått på samband mellan par bildinstanser. Vi testar vår metod på en dataset av meningspar och belyser korrelationen mellan våra metriska och mänskliga bedömningar av semantisk likhet. Dessutom föreslår vi en tillämpning av vår åtgärd för klustring av raminstanser för att extrahera prototypa kunskaper från naturligt språk.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණ සෙමාන්ටික්ස් තමයි හොඳ ස්ථාපනය කරලා තියෙන ස්වභාවික භාෂයේ අදහසක් පරීක්ෂණාත්මක මේ වැඩේ අපි අල්ලගන්නවා ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ගැන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සම්බන්ධතා කරන්න. අපි අපේ විධානය පරීක්ෂා කරන්නේ වාක්ෂි ජෝඩාවක් ගැන, අපේ මෙට්\u200dරික් සහ මිනිස්සු විධානයක් ගැන සම්බන්ධ විශ්වා තවත්, අපි ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ භාෂාවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂිත දන්නවක් අරගෙන යන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා.', 'so': 'Frame semantics waa qoraal aad u dhisan, kaas oo looga jeedo micneheeda afka asalka ah oo ku qoran qoraalka xisaabta. Markaas waxan waxaynu ku talo galaynaa in aan soo jeedno qiyaas ah oo la xiriira xaaladaha noocyada firaaqada ah dhexdooda. We test our method on a dataset of sentence pairs, highlighting the correlation between our metric and human judgments of semantic similarity.  Furthermore, waxaynu horumarinaynaa codsigayada si aan u soo bixino aqoonta qaabilsan ee afka dabiicadda ah.', 'ta': 'சட்டத்தின் பெம்மான்டிக்ஸ் கணிப்பொறிகளில் இயல்பான மொழியின் அர்த்தைக் குறிப்பிடுவதற்கான ஒரு நன்றாக ந இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட அளவு சட்டத்தின் நிகழ்வுகளுக்கு இடையே தொடர்புகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நாம் எங்கள் முறைமையை சோதிக்கிறோம் வாக்கியம் ஜோடியில் உள்ள தகவல் அமைப்பில், எங்கள் மெட்ரிக் மற்றும் மனித த தீர்ப்புகள் ஒ அதற்கு மேலும், நாம் எங்கள் அளபுரையின் பயன்பாட்டை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் சட்டத்தை நிகழ்வுகளுக்கு முன்னோட்டிக் அறிவ', 'ur': 'فرم سیمانٹیکس کامپیوتریشن ترمیم میں طبیعی زبان کا معنی معلوم کرنے کے لئے بہترین ساختہ فرم ہے. اس کام میں ہم چاہتے ہیں کہ فرم کے جوڑوں کے درمیان تعلق کا مقدار اندازہ پیش کریں. ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو ایک ڈیٹ سٹ کے جوڑوں پر آزمایا ہے، ہمارے متریک اور انسان کے فیصلے کے درمیان سیمنٹی برابری کا ارتباط کرتا ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے اپنے اندازے کی ایک کاربرد کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ فرم مثالیں کھولنے کے لئے طبیعی زبان سے پروٹوٹیپٹی علم نکالیں۔', 'uz': "Freym semantika kompyuterlar soʻzlarida tabiiy tilning ma'nosini aniqlash uchun yaxshi oʻrnatilgan freym. Bu ishda biz bir necha freym xususiyatlarining orasidagi murakkab bog'liq narsalarini davom etishni istaysiz. Biz metrik va inson xususiyatlarimizning bir xil qo'l tarkibini sinab ko'rib chiqqamiz. Ko'rsatganda, biz chegaramizni tasavvur qilamiz, asl tildan prototypik bilimni chiqarish uchun freym xususiyatlarimizni tasavvur qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Chế độ ngữ pháp khung là một cơ sở được thiết lập đại diện cho ý nghĩa của ngôn ngữ tự nhiên theo thuật to án. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi dự định đề xuất một thước đo về mối quan hệ giữa các cặp khung hình. Chúng tôi kiểm tra phương phán của mình về một bộ câu một, cách tốt nhận ra sự tương quan giữa cái của các đó đó đó với cái sự giống một ngườ Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đề nghị áp dụng biện pháp của chúng tôi để cấu kết các trường hợp khung để trích dẫn kiến thức nguyên mẫu từ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên.', 'bg': 'Рамковата семантика е добре установена рамка, която представя значението на естествения език в изчислителни термини. В тази работа имаме за цел да предложим количествена мярка на връзката между двойки рамкови инстанции. Тестваме метода си върху набор от данни от двойки изречения, подчертавайки корелацията между нашите метрични и човешки преценки за семантично сходство. Освен това предлагаме приложение на нашата мярка за клъстериране на кадрови инстанции за извличане на прототипни знания от естествения език.', 'nl': 'Frame semantica is een goed gevestigd framework om de betekenis van natuurlijke taal in computationele termen weer te geven. In dit werk willen we een kwantitatieve maat voor relatedness tussen paren van frame instances voorstellen. We testen onze methode op een dataset van zinsparen, waarbij de correlatie tussen onze metrische en menselijke oordelen van semantische gelijkenis wordt benadrukt. Verder stellen we een toepassing van onze maatregel voor clustering frame instances voor om prototypische kennis uit natuurlijke taal te halen.', 'da': 'Rammesemantik er en veletableret ramme til at repræsentere betydningen af naturligt sprog i beregningsmæssige termer. I dette arbejde har vi til formål at foreslå et kvantitativt mål for relaterethed mellem par af rammeinstanser. Vi tester vores metode på et datasæt af sætningspar og fremhæver sammenhængen mellem vores metriske og menneskelige vurderinger af semantisk lighed. Desuden foreslår vi en anvendelse af vores foranstaltning til at klynge rammeinstanser for at udtrække prototyp viden fra naturligt sprog.', 'de': 'Rahmensemantik ist ein etabliertes Framework, um die Bedeutung natürlicher Sprache in computergestützten Begriffen darzustellen. In dieser Arbeit wollen wir ein quantitatives Maß für die Verwandtschaft zwischen Paaren von Frame-Instanzen vorschlagen. Wir testen unsere Methode an einem Datensatz von Satzpaaren und heben die Korrelation zwischen unseren metrischen und menschlichen Urteilen der semantischen Ähnlichkeit hervor. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir eine Anwendung unserer Maßnahme zum Clustering von Frame-Instanzen vor, um prototypisches Wissen aus natürlicher Sprache zu extrahieren.', 'id': 'Semantik bingkai adalah bingkai yang ditetapkan dengan baik untuk mewakili arti bahasa alam dalam terma komputasi. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami bermaksud untuk mengusulkan ukuran kuantitatif hubungan antara pasangan contoh bingkai. Kami menguji metode kami pada dataset pasangan kalimat, mempertimbangkan korelasi antara metrik dan penghakiman manusia tentang persamaan semantis. Selain itu, kami mengusulkan aplikasi tindakan kami untuk mengumpulkan contoh bingkai untuk mengekstraksi pengetahuan prototipik dari bahasa alam.', 'ko': '프레임 어의학은 성숙한 프레임으로 계산 용어로 자연 언어의 의미를 표현한다.이 작업에서 우리의 목표는 양적 조치 간의 관계 대 프레임 실례를 제시하는 것이다.우리는 문장에서 데이터 집합에 대해 우리의 방법을 테스트하고 우리의 도량과 인류가 의미의 유사성에 대한 판단 간의 상관성을 강조했다.그 밖에 우리는 우리의 방법을 응용하여 프레임 실례를 분류하고 자연 언어에서 원형 지식을 추출하는 방법을 제시했다.', 'fa': 'سیمانتیک فرم یک چهارچوب بسیار قائل شده برای نشان دادن معنی زبان طبیعی در شرایط محاسبه است. در این کار، ما هدف داریم که یک اندازه مقداری از ارتباط بین جفت نمونه\u200cها پیشنهاد کنیم. ما روش خودمان را روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cای از جفت\u200cهای جمله آزمایش می\u200cکنیم و ارتباط بین قضاوت\u200cهای متریک و انسان\u200cمان از شبیه\u200cهای semantic را مشخص می\u200cکنیم. به علاوه، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک کاربردی از اندازه\u200cهای خودمان برای جمع کردن نمونه\u200cهای فرم برای اخراج دانش\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی از زبان طبیعی استفاده کنیم.', 'sw': 'Frame semantics is a well-established framework to represent the meaning of natural language in computational terms.  Katika kazi hii, tunakusudia kupendekeza kiwango cha kiasi cha mahusiano kati ya viwili vya mfumo. Tunazijaribu njia yetu kwenye seti ya takwimu za hukumu wawili, tunaonyesha uhusiano kati ya mitindo na hukumu za binadamu za usawa wa kimapenzi. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza kutumia hatua yetu kwa ajili ya matukio ya mifumo ya kutangaza maarifa ya mifano kutoka lugha ya asili.', 'tr': 'Semantik çerädçisi, täbiň diliniň habarlaşygyny kalkular şertleri bilen üýtgetmek üçin gowy gurnalýan bir çerädçidir. Bu işde, çeräm durumlaryň arasynda bir miktarly çykyşlygyny teklip etmek üçin amaçlandyrys. Biz öz yönümizi semantik ýaly çykyşymyzyň metriýa we adamlaryň arasyndaky çykyşymyzy barlaýarys. Munuň üçin, tebigy dilden prototipik bilim açmak üçin çözümlenmäge biziň ölçümizi maslahat berýäris.', 'af': "Raam semantiek is 'n goed geïnstalleerde raamwerk om die betekening van natuurlike taal in rekenasiese bedrywe te verteenwoordig. In hierdie werk is ons doel om 'n kvantitatiewe maat van verwantigheid tussen paar raam voorbeelde te voorstel. Ons probeer ons metode op 'n datastel van sin paar, verlig die korrelasie tussen ons metriese en menslike oordelinge van semantiese gelykheid. Ons voorstel ook 'n aansoek van ons maat vir klastering raam voorbeelde om prototipiese kennis uit natuurlike taal uit te trek.", 'sq': 'Semantika e kornizës është një kornizë e vendosur mirë për të përfaqësuar kuptimin e gjuhës natyrore në terma llogaritare. Në këtë punë, ne synojmë të propozojmë një masë kuantitative të lidhjes midis çifteve rastesh frame. We test our method on a dataset of sentence pairs, highlighting the correlation between our metric and human judgments of semantic similarity.  Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë një aplikim të masave tona për grupimin e rasteve kuadri për të nxjerrë njohurinë prototipike nga gjuha natyrore.', 'am': 'የፍሬም ስሜንቲካ በተቆጣጠረ ቋንቋዎች የፍጥረት ቋንቋ አካሄዱን ለማስተካከል የተመሠረተ ፍሬም ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ በሁለት ዓይነቶች መካከል የፍሬም ሁኔታዎች መካከል ግንኙነት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የድምፅ አካባቢ እና በሰው ፍርድ መካከል ግንኙነትን እና በአካባቢ ግንኙነታችንን እና በአካባቢ ግንኙነት እና በአካባቢ ግንኙነታችንን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የምናስፈልገውን የፍሬም ምሳሌዎች ከፍጥረት እውቀትን ከመፍጠር ቋንቋ ለማውጣት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'hr': 'Frame semantika je dobro uspostavljen okvir za predstavljanje smisla prirodnog jezika u računalnim terminima. U ovom poslu ciljamo predložiti kvantitativnu mjeru odnosa između parova okvirnih slučajeva. Testiramo našu metodu na setu podataka par rečenica, naglašavajući korelaciju između naših metričkih i ljudskih sudova o semantičkoj sličnosti. Nadalje, predlažemo primjenu naše mjere za skupljanje okvirnih slučajeva da izvučemo prototipično znanje iz prirodnog jezika.', 'az': 'Çerçive semantik, hesaplama şartlarında doğal dilin anlamını göstərmək üçün yaxşı qurulmuş bir çerçiftir. Bu işlərdə, çift fərm örnəkləri arasında sayısal ölçüdə bağlılıq təklif etmək istəyirik. Biz metodlarımızı bir cümləlik çiftləri ilə imtahana çəkirik, metrik və insan hökmlərimizin semantik bənzərinin bağlantısını işıqlandırır. Daha sonra, biz təbiətli dildən prototipik bilgi çıxartmaq üçün çəkilmə məsələmizin uygulamasını təklif edirik.', 'hy': 'Ֆրամ սեմանտիկան լավ հաստատված շրջանակ է, որն արտահայտում է բնական լեզվի իմաստը հաշվարկներով: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք նպատակում ենք առաջարկել մի քանակական չափ կապվածության երկու օրինակների միջև: Մենք փորձում ենք մեր մեթոդը նախադասությունների զույգերի տվյալների վրա, ներկայացնելով մեր մետրական և մարդկային դատողությունների կապը սեմանտիկ նմանության միջև: Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք մեր չափումների կիրառումը շրջանակի օրինակների խմբավորման համար, որպեսզի նախատիպիկ գիտելիքները բնական լեզվից դուրս գան:', 'bn': 'ফ্রেমের সেমেন্টিক্স একটি ভালো স্থাপন করা ফ্রেম যার অর্থ গণনাবলীতে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়। এই কাজে আমরা চেষ্টা করছি যে কোন ধরনের ফ্রেমের মধ্যে যুক্তির পরিমাণ সম্পর্ক প্রস্তাব করা। আমরা আমাদের পদ্ধতি সংক্রান্ত জোড়ার ডাটা সেটের উপর পরীক্ষা করি, যা আমাদের মেট্রিক এবং মানুষের সামান্য বিচারের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক ত এছাড়াও আমরা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা থেকে প্রোটোটোটিপিক্যাল জ্ঞান বের করার জন্য আমাদের পরিমাপের প্রস্তাব করছি।', 'bs': 'Frame semantika je dobro uspostavljen okvir za predstavljanje smisla prirodnog jezika u računalnim terminima. U ovom poslu, ciljamo predložiti kvantitativnu mjeru odnosa između parova okvirnih slučajeva. Testiramo našu metodu na setu podataka par rečenica, naglašavajući korelaciju između naših metričkih i ljudskih sudova o semantičkoj sličnosti. Osim toga, predlažemo primjenu naše mjere za skupljanje okvirnih slučajeva da izvučemo prototipično znanje iz prirodnog jezika.', 'cs': 'Sémantika rámců je dobře zavedený rámec pro reprezentaci významu přirozeného jazyka ve výpočetních termínech. V této práci si klademe za cíl navrhnout kvantitativní měřítko vztahu mezi páry rámcových instancí. Naši metodu testujeme na datové sadě větových párů a zdůrazňujeme korelaci mezi našimi metrickými a lidskými úsudky sémantické podobnosti. Dále navrhujeme aplikaci našeho opatření pro clusterování rámcových instancí k extrakci prototypických znalostí z přirozeného jazyka.', 'ca': "La semàntica del marc és un marc ben estable per representar el significat del llenguatge natural en termes computacionals. En aquest treball, volem proposar una mesura quantitativa de relació entre parelles d'instances de marc. Testem el nostre mètode en un conjunt de dades de parells de frases, destacant la correlació entre els nostres judicis mètrics i humans de similitud semàntica. A més, proposem una aplicació de la nostra mesura per agrupar instances de marc per extrair el coneixement prototípic del llenguatge natural.", 'et': 'Raami semantika on hästi väljakujunenud raamistik, mis esindab looduskeele tähendust arvutuslikes mõistes. Käesolevas töös on meie eesmärk pakkuda välja kvantitatiivne mõõde seose paaride raam eksemplaride vahel. Testime oma meetodit lausepaaride andmekogumil, rõhutades seost meie meetrika ja inimese semantilise sarnasuse hinnangute vahel. Lisaks pakume välja meie meetme rakendamise raami eksemplaride klastristamiseks, et saada looduskeelest prototüüpilisi teadmisi.', 'fi': 'Framesemantiikka on vakiintunut viitekehys, joka edustaa luonnollisen kielen merkitystä laskennallisesti. Tässä työssä pyrimme ehdottamaan kvantitatiivista suhdetta frame instanssiparejen välillä. Testaamme menetelmäämme lauseparien aineistolla korostaen metristen ja inhimillisten semanttisten samankaltaisuuksien välistä korrelaatiota. Lisäksi ehdotamme toimenpidettä kehyskokoelmien klusteroimiseksi, jotta luonnollisesta kielestä saadaan prototyypillinen tieto.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Daga wannan aikin, Munã nufin mu ƙara wani gwargwadon mutane da suka yi danganki a tsakanin misali biyu na firam. Tuna jarraba hanyoyinmu a kan danne-dangane biyu na cire, kan ka ƙayyade mazaunin a tsakanin metric da mutane da ke daidaita. Furan haka, Munã goyyar da shirin ayukanmu wa masu samun firam da za'a sami ilmi na misãlai daga harshen asiyya.", 'sk': 'Frame semantika je dobro uveljavljen okvir, ki predstavlja pomen naravnega jezika v računalniških izrazih. V tem delu želimo predlagati kvantitativno merilo povezanosti med pari okvirnih primerov. Našo metodo testiramo na naboru podatkov parov stavkov, pri čemer poudarjamo korelacijo med našimi metričnimi in človeškimi presojami semantične podobnosti. Poleg tega predlagamo uporabo našega ukrepa za grozdje primerov okvirja za pridobivanje prototipskega znanja iz naravnega jezika.', 'he': 'סמנטיקה מסגרת היא סגרת מוסכמת היטב כדי לייצג את המשמעות של שפה טבעית במונחים מחשביים. בעבודה הזאת, אנחנו מתכוונים להציע מידה כמונית של קשר בין זוגות מקרים מסגרת. אנחנו בודקים את השיטה שלנו על קבוצת נתונים של זוגות משפטים, ומדגישים את הקשר בין השיפוטים המטריים שלנו לבין האדם של דומות סמנטיות. חוץ מזה, אנו מציעים שימוש של המידע שלנו לקבוע מקרים מסגרת כדי להוציא ידע אבטוטיפי משפה טבעית.', 'jv': 'semanti frame kebutine sampeyan akeh nesaturan kanggo ngubah Gambar kelangan anyar luwih dumadhi cara-luwih dumadhi lan tambahan. Nang iki trabah, kita hakan di nggawe sistem inimbang akeh tanggal nggawe Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem dadi nggawe barang kelas, dadi nggawe barang kelas karo perusahaan winih karo hal-hal sing perusahaan semanti iki dadi. Lah tambah, kita supoyo aplikasi kanggo nyeleh kanggo nggawe barang sliramu kanggo nggawe layang prototipi kanggo ingkang alih dadi.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གཞི་semantics་ནི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་ནང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གནད་དོན་དག་ཚང་བ་ཞིག་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཚད་རྩིས་ཅན་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདོད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ཚིག་ཕུང་གི་ཚང་ཕུང་གི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཕུང་ཞིག་ནང་ལ་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མི་རིགས་སྔར་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེ ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་རིའི་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་ནས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྐོར་ལས།'}
{'en': 'Solving Feature Sparseness in Text Classification using Core-Periphery Decomposition', 'ar': 'حل تباين الميزات في تصنيف النص باستخدام تحليل Core-Periphery Decomposition', 'pt': 'Resolvendo a dispersão de recursos na classificação de texto usando a decomposição de núcleo-periferia', 'es': 'Solución de la dispersión de características en la clasificación de texto mediante la descomposición de núcleo-periferia', 'fr': "Résolution de la dispersion des entités dans la classification de texte à l'aide de la décomposition cœur-périphérie", 'ja': 'コア-周辺分解を用いたテキスト分類における特徴のまばらさの解決', 'hi': 'कोर-परिधि अपघटन का उपयोग करके पाठ वर्गीकरण में सुविधा विरलता को हल करना', 'zh': '用核心-外围分解文本分类中特徵疏性', 'ru': 'Решение проблемы редкости признаков в классификации текста с использованием декомпозиции ядра и периферии', 'ga': 'Réiteach Gné Ghainimh in Aicmiú Téacs ag baint úsáide as dianscaoileadh Croí-Imill', 'hu': 'A szövegosztályozás szempontjából ritkaság megoldása mag-periféria bontással', 'it': 'Risolvere la mancanza di funzionalità nella classificazione del testo utilizzando la decomposizione Core-Periphery', 'kk': 'Мәтін классификациясындағы мүмкіндік аралығын шешу', 'el': 'Επίλυση της σπανιότητας χαρακτηριστικών στην ταξινόμηση κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας την αποσύνθεση πυρήνα-περιφέρειας', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციაში ფუნქტურის განსხვავება', 'lt': 'Teksto klasifikacijos savybių spartumas sprendžiamas naudojant pagrindinę periferinę dekompoziciją', 'mk': 'Решење на брзината на карактеристиката во текстовата класификација со користење на основната декомпозиција', 'ms': 'Menyelesaikan Kecepatan Feature dalam Klasifikasi Teks menggunakan Nyahkomposisi-Periferi-Core', 'ml': 'കോര്\u200d- പെരിഫറി ഡിസോമ്പോസ്റ്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പദാവലി ക്ലാസിഷനിലുള്ള സ്പെയിറ്റ് പരിഹരിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Is-Soluzzjoni tal-Ħafna Karatteristika fil-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test bl-użu tad-Dekompożizzjoni Ewlenija-Periferali', 'no': 'Løyser funksjonsmellomrom i tekstklassifikasjon ved hjelpeperiferisk dekompositering', 'pl': 'Rozwiązywanie oszczędności funkcji w klasyfikacji tekstu przy użyciu dekompozycji rdzenia i peryferii', 'sr': 'Решавање празница функције у класификацији текста користирајући декомпозицију периферије', 'si': 'පාළුවන් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාව විස්තර කරන්න', 'so': 'Isticmaalka jardiinada koontaroolka', 'sv': 'Lösa funktionsbrist i textklassificering med kärnperifernedbrytning', 'mn': 'Үндсэн-периферийн хувьд хэмжээст хэмжээст хэмжээст хэлбэрийг шийдэх', 'ur': 'پاکستان کلاسیفشن میں فکرت کی جگہ حل کر رہی ہے', 'ro': 'Rezolvarea lipsei caracteristicilor în clasificarea textului utilizând dezcompunerea nucleului-periferiei', 'ta': 'Solving Feature Sparseness in Text Classification using Core-Periphery Decomposition', 'uz': 'Izoh', 'vi': 'Chia sẻ thanh hư hỏng nhãn được giải quyết bằng lõi phân chia cắt', 'hr': 'Rešavanje mjera funkcije u klasifikaciji teksta koristeći osnovnu perifernu dekompoziciju', 'da': 'Løsning af funktionssparsomhed i tekstklassifikation ved hjælp af Core-Periphery Decomposition', 'bg': 'Решаване на оскъдността на характеристиките при класификацията на текста с помощта на разлагане на основната периферия', 'nl': 'Beperkte eigenschappen oplossen in tekstclassificatie met behulp van Core-Periphery Decomposition', 'fa': 'ШӯЩ„ ЩҒШ§ШөЩ„ЩҮ ЩҲЫҢЪҳЪҜЫҢ ШҜШұ Ъ©Щ„Ш§ШівҖҢШіШ§ШІЫҢ Щ…ШӘЩҶ ШЁШ§ Ш§ШіШӘЩҒШ§ШҜЩҮ Ш§ШІ ЩҶШ§ЩҮЩ…Ш§ЩҮЩҶЪҜвҖҢШіШ§ШІЫҢ Ш§ШөЩ„ЫҢ', 'id': 'Solving Feature Sparseness in Text Classification using Core-Periphery Decomposition', 'ko': '핵-외곽 분해를 이용하여 텍스트 분류 중의 특징 희소 문제를 해결하다', 'sw': 'Tatizo la Uhisia katika Makala ya Maandishi kwa kutumia Makala ya Uhalifu', 'tr': 'Kere-Periferi Pozicija ullanýan metin klasifikasynda metin gapysyny çykar', 'af': 'Verlos eienskappe Sparsigheid in Teks Klassifikasie gebruik Kore- Periferie Onsamposisie', 'am': 'position', 'hy': 'Տեքստի դասակարգում գտնվող հատկությունների արագությունը լուծելու միջոցով հիմնական տարածաշրջանի կոմպոզիցիա', 'az': 'ńįlk Periferi Dekompozisyonunun istifad…ôsi il…ô M…ôtn KlasifikasńĪndakńĪ √Ėzellik BoŇüluńüunu √ß…ôkir', 'de': 'Beheben von Feature-Sparseness in der Textklassifizierung mit Hilfe von Core-Periphery Decomposition', 'bn': 'কোর- পেরিফেরি ডিসোম্পেশন ব্যবহার করে টেক্সট ক্লাসেশনে বৈশিষ্ট্যের স্পেরেস সমাধান করো', 'cs': 'Řešení nedostatků funkcí při klasifikaci textu pomocí dekompozice jádra a periférie', 'bs': 'Rešavanje prostora funkcije u klasifikaciji teksta koristeći osnovnu dekompoziciju', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e shpejtësisë së funksionit në klasifikimin e tekstit duke përdorur dekompozimin e periferisë kryesore', 'et': 'Teksti klassifitseerimise funktsioonide vaesuse lahendamine põhiperifeeria lagunemise abil', 'ca': "Solucionar l'escassetat de característiques en la classificació de text fent servir la descomposició de la periferia central", 'fi': 'Ominaisuuksien niukkuuden ratkaiseminen tekstiluokituksessa ydinoheislaitteen hajoamisella', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Reševanje pomanjkljivosti funkcij pri klasifikaciji besedila z uporabo razpadanja jedrne perifere', 'he': 'לפתור חסרות אופייניות בסדרת טקסט באמצעות התפרצות פריפריה-עיקרית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་དབྱིབས་ཕལ་ཆེར་སྒྲིག་ནང་ལ་ཆོས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་བར་སྟོང་བཞག་པ'}
{'en': 'Feature sparseness is a problem common to cross-domain and short-text classification tasks. To overcome this feature sparseness problem, we propose a novel method based on graph decomposition to find candidate features for expanding feature vectors. Specifically, we first create a feature-relatedness graph, which is subsequently decomposed into core-periphery (CP) pairs and use the peripheries as the expansion candidates of the cores. We expand both training and test instances using the computed related features and use them to train a text classifier. We observe that prioritising features that are common to both training and test instances as cores during the CP decomposition to further improve the accuracy of text classification. We evaluate the proposed CP-decomposition-based feature expansion method on benchmark datasets for cross-domain sentiment classification and short-text classification. Our experimental results show that the proposed method consistently outperforms all baselines on short-text classification tasks, and perform competitively with pivot-based cross-domain sentiment classification methods.', 'ar': 'يعد تناثر الميزات مشكلة شائعة في مهام تصنيف النطاقات والنصوص القصيرة. للتغلب على مشكلة تناثر الميزة ، نقترح طريقة جديدة تعتمد على تحليل الرسم البياني للعثور على ميزات مرشحة لتوسيع نواقل الميزات. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم أولاً بإنشاء رسم بياني متعلق بالميزات ، والذي يتحلل لاحقًا إلى أزواج محيطية أساسية (CP) ونستخدم الأطراف كمرشحين لتوسيع النوى. نقوم بتوسيع حالات التدريب والاختبار باستخدام الميزات ذات الصلة المحسوبة ونستخدمها لتدريب مصنف النص. نلاحظ أن تحديد أولويات الميزات المشتركة لكل من حالات التدريب والاختبار كنواة أثناء تحلل CP لزيادة تحسين دقة تصنيف النص. نقوم بتقييم طريقة توسيع الميزة القائمة على تحليل CP المقترحة على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية لتصنيف المشاعر عبر المجالات وتصنيف النص القصير. تُظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أن الطريقة المقترحة تتفوق باستمرار على جميع خطوط الأساس في مهام تصنيف النص القصير ، وتؤدي بشكل تنافسي باستخدام طرق تصنيف المشاعر عبر المجالات القائمة على المحور.', 'fr': "La rareté des fonctionnalités est un problème courant dans les tâches de classification entre domaines et en texte court. Pour résoudre ce problème de parcimonie de caractéristiques, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode basée sur la décomposition de graphes afin de trouver des entités candidates pour développer des vecteurs de caractéristiques. Plus précisément, nous créons d'abord un graphe de relation entre les entités, qui est ensuite décomposé en paires cœur-périphérie (CP) et utilisons les périphériques comme candidats d'extension des cœurs. Nous développons à la fois les instances de formation et de test à l'aide des fonctionnalités associées calculées et les utilisons pour entraîner un classificateur de texte. Nous observons que la priorisation des fonctionnalités communes à la fois aux instances de formation et de test en tant que cœurs pendant la décomposition CP permet d'améliorer encore la précision de la classification du texte. Nous évaluons la méthode d'expansion des caractéristiques basée sur la décomposition CP proposée sur des ensembles de données de référence pour la classification des sentiments entre domaines et la classification en texte court. Nos résultats expérimentaux montrent que la méthode proposée surpasse systématiquement toutes les lignes de base pour les tâches de classification de texte court, et qu'elle est compétitive avec les méthodes de classification des sentiments interdomaines basées sur pivot.", 'pt': 'A escassez de recursos é um problema comum para tarefas de classificação de texto curto e entre domínios. Para superar esse problema de escassez de recursos, propomos um novo método baseado na decomposição de grafos para encontrar recursos candidatos para expandir vetores de recursos. Especificamente, primeiro criamos um gráfico de relação de características, que é posteriormente decomposto em pares núcleo-periferia (CP) e usamos as periferias como candidatas à expansão dos núcleos. Expandimos as instâncias de treinamento e teste usando os recursos relacionados computados e os usamos para treinar um classificador de texto. Observamos que priorizar recursos que são comuns às instâncias de treinamento e teste como núcleos durante a decomposição do CP para melhorar ainda mais a precisão da classificação de texto. Avaliamos o método de expansão de recursos baseado em decomposição de CP proposto em conjuntos de dados de referência para classificação de sentimento entre domínios e classificação de texto curto. Nossos resultados experimentais mostram que o método proposto supera consistentemente todas as linhas de base em tarefas de classificação de texto curto e tem um desempenho competitivo com métodos de classificação de sentimento entre domínios baseados em pivô.', 'es': 'La escasez de funciones es un problema común en las tareas de clasificación de texto corto y entre dominios. Para superar este problema de dispersión de características, proponemos un método novedoso basado en la descomposición de gráficos para encontrar características candidatas para expandir los vectores de características. Específicamente, primero creamos un gráfico de relación de características, que posteriormente se descompone en pares núcleo-periferia (CP) y utilizamos las periferias como candidatos de expansión de los núcleos. Ampliamos las instancias de entrenamiento y prueba utilizando las funciones relacionadas calculadas y las utilizamos para entrenar un clasificador de texto. Observamos que priorizar las funciones que son comunes tanto a las instancias de entrenamiento como a las de prueba como núcleos durante la descomposición del CP para mejorar aún más la precisión de la clasificación del texto. Evaluamos el método propuesto de expansión de características basado en la descomposición de CP en conjuntos de datos de referencia para la clasificación de opiniones entre dominios y la clasificación de texto corto. Nuestros resultados experimentales muestran que el método propuesto supera sistemáticamente a todas las líneas de base en las tareas de clasificación de texto corto y tiene un rendimiento competitivo con los métodos de clasificación de opinión entre dominios basados en pivote.', 'ja': 'フィーチャーのまばらさは、クロスドメインおよびショートテキスト分類タスクに共通する問題です。 この特徴のまばらさの問題を克服するために、特徴ベクトルを拡張するための候補特徴を見つけるためのグラフ分解に基づく新規の方法を提案する。 具体的には、まず特徴関連グラフを作成し、その後コア-ペリフェリー（ CP ）ペアに分解し、コアの拡張候補としてペリフェリーを使用する。 計算された関連機能を使用してトレーニングとテストの両方のインスタンスを拡張し、テキスト分類子のトレーニングに使用します。 CP分解中にトレーニングとテストの両方のインスタンスに共通する機能をコアとして優先することで、テキスト分類の精度をさらに向上させることが観察されます。 我々は、クロスドメインセンチメント分類とショートテキスト分類のためのベンチマークデータセット上で、提案されたCP - decomposition - based機能拡張法を評価する。 私たちの実験結果は、提案された方法が短文分類タスクのすべてのベースラインを一貫して上回り、ピボットベースのクロスドメインセンチメント分類方法と競争的に実行することを示しています。', 'zh': '特征疏者,跨域短文之分也。 求其疏者,图分解之新,以求广向量之选。 具体来说,首创特征相关图,既而分解为核心-外围(CP)对,并以外围为核选。 吾以计相关,广教试实,而用之以练文本分类器。 臣等观CP分解之际,以训练及试例所共特徵为核心优先级序,以进一步提高文本类准确性。 本文于基准数据集上评估所出CP分解之特徵广法,以跨域情类短文本类。 臣等之实验结果表明,所陈终于短文本分类之中,优于所有基线,而与数透视之跨域情类有竞争力。', 'hi': 'सुविधा विरलता क्रॉस-डोमेन और लघु-पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों के लिए एक आम समस्या है। इस सुविधा विरलता समस्या को दूर करने के लिए, हम सुविधा वैक्टर के विस्तार के लिए उम्मीदवार सुविधाओं को खोजने के लिए ग्राफ अपघटन के आधार पर एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम पहले एक सुविधा-संबंधित ग्राफ बनाते हैं, जिसे बाद में कोर-परिधि (सीपी) जोड़े में विघटित किया जाता है और कोर के विस्तार उम्मीदवारों के रूप में परिधि का उपयोग किया जाता है। हम परिकलित संबंधित सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षण और परीक्षण दोनों उदाहरणों का विस्तार करते हैं और पाठ क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए उनका उपयोग करते हैं। हम देखते हैं कि पाठ वर्गीकरण की सटीकता में और सुधार करने के लिए सीपी अपघटन के दौरान कोर के रूप में प्रशिक्षण और परीक्षण दोनों उदाहरणों के लिए आम सुविधाओं को प्राथमिकता देना। हम क्रॉस-डोमेन भावना वर्गीकरण और लघु-पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रस्तावित सीपी-अपघटन-आधारित सुविधा विस्तार विधि का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि लगातार लघु-पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर सभी आधार रेखाओं को मात देती है, और धुरी-आधारित क्रॉस-डोमेन भावना वर्गीकरण विधियों के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन करती है।', 'ru': 'Редкость признаков - это проблема, характерная для задач междоменной и короткотекстовой классификации. Чтобы преодолеть эту проблему редкости признаков, мы предлагаем новый метод, основанный на декомпозиции графа, чтобы найти признаки-кандидаты для расширения векторов признаков. В частности, мы сначала создаем график родства признаков, который впоследствии разлагается на пары ядро-периферия (CP) и используем периферии в качестве кандидатов на расширение ядер. Мы расширяем как обучающие, так и тестовые экземпляры, используя вычисляемые связанные признаки, и используем их для обучения текстового классификатора. Мы наблюдаем, что определение приоритетности функций, которые являются общими как для тренировочных, так и для тестовых экземпляров в качестве ядер во время разложения CP, чтобы дополнительно повысить точность классификации текста. Мы оцениваем предлагаемый метод расширения признаков на основе CP-разложения на базовых наборах данных для классификации междоменных настроений и короткой текстовой классификации. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый метод последовательно превосходит все базовые линии по задачам короткотекстовой классификации и действует конкурентно с методами шарнирной междоменной классификации.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb í an ghanntanas gné a bhaineann le tascanna aicmithe tras-fearainn agus gearrthéacs. Chun an fhadhb seo a shárú, molaimid modh núíosach bunaithe ar dhianscaoileadh graif chun gnéithe iarrthóra a aimsiú le haghaidh gné-veicteora atá ag méadú. Go sonrach, cruthaímid graf a bhaineann le gné-ghné ar dtús, a dhianscaoiltear ina bpéirí croí-imeall (CP) ina dhiaidh sin agus úsáidimid na forimeallaigh mar iarrthóirí leathnaithe na gcroíthe. Déanaimid an dá chás oiliúna agus tástála a leathnú agus úsáid á baint as na gnéithe a bhaineann le ríomh agus úsáidimid iad chun aicmitheoir téacs a oiliúint. Tugaimid faoi deara go dtugtar tosaíocht do ghnéithe atá comónta do chásanna oiliúna agus tástála araon mar chroíleacáin le linn an dianscaoilte CP chun cruinneas rangú an téacs a fheabhsú tuilleadh. Déanaimid measúnú ar an modh leathnaithe gné atá bunaithe ar dhianscaoileadh CP atá beartaithe ar thacair thacair thacair le haghaidh aicmiú meoin tras-fearainn agus aicmiú gearrthéacs. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn an modh atá beartaithe go seasta gach bonnlíne ar thascanna aicmithe gearrthéacs, agus go bhfeidhmíonn sé go hiomaíoch le modhanna aicmithe braite tras-fearainn bunaithe ar mhaighdeog.', 'ka': 'ფუნქტურის წარმოდგენება არის საერთო პრობლემა, რომელიც ძირითადი დიომინის და კრეტქტური ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის დავალებებისთვის. ამ პრობლემას გადარჩენისთვის პრობლემა, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ პრობლემა პრობლემა, რომელიც განაკომპოციაციაზე დაბაზეულია, რომ კონდიდეტური ფუნქციები განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ პირველი შექმნა ფუნქციების შესაბამისი გრაფიკი, რომელიც შემდეგ აკომპონცირებულია core-periphery (CP) pairs-ში და გამოყენებთ პერიფერები როგორც კონდიდეტების გაფართ ჩვენ განვითარებთ ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის გამოყენება და გამოყენება ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციაში. ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ პრიორიტიფიკაციის ფუნქციები, რომლებიც ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის მართებას უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ გავამუშავებთ CP-ს განაკომპორციაციის განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციების განსაზღვრების მეტი ბენქმარკის მონაცემების კლასიფიკაციის და კრეტქტიკური ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის შე ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენება, რომ პროგენტიური პროგენტის შესაძლებელად ყველა ბაზი ხაზების კლასიფიკაციის საქმებზე გააკეთება და კონპექტიურად გავაკეთება პროგენტი', 'hu': 'A funkciók ritkasága a tartományok közötti és rövid szövegű osztályozási feladatok esetében gyakori probléma. A funkciók ritkaságának problémájának leküzdése érdekében egy új módszert javasolunk, amely a grafikonok bomlásán alapul, hogy megtaláljuk a funkcióvektorok bővítésére jelölt funkciókat. Konkrétan először létrehozunk egy funkció-relatív grafikont, amelyet később mag-periféria (CP) párokra bontunk, és a perifériákat használjuk a mag kiterjesztési jelölteként. A számított kapcsolódó funkciók felhasználásával bővítjük a képzési és tesztelési példányokat, és használjuk őket egy szövegosztályozó képzésére. Megfigyeljük, hogy a CP bomlása során a szövegosztályozás pontosságának további javítása érdekében azok a funkciók priorizálása, amelyek mind a képzés, mind a tesztpéldányok magjaként használhatók. A javasolt CP-bomláson alapuló funkcióbővítési módszert értékeljük a tartományközi hangulatosztályozáshoz és rövid szövegosztályozáshoz szükséges benchmark adatkészleteken. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer következetesen felülmúlja a rövid szövegű osztályozási feladatok valamennyi alapját, és versenyképes a pivot-alapú cross-domain sentiment osztályozási módszerekkel.', 'el': 'Η έλλειψη χαρακτηριστικών είναι ένα πρόβλημα κοινό σε εργασίες ταξινόμησης μεταξύ τομέων και σύντομου κειμένου. Για να ξεπεραστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα σπανιότητας χαρακτηριστικών, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο βασισμένη στην αποσύνθεση γραφήματος για την εύρεση υποψήφιων χαρακτηριστικών για την επέκταση διανυσμάτων χαρακτηριστικών. Συγκεκριμένα, αρχικά δημιουργούμε ένα γράφημα συσχέτισης χαρακτηριστικών, το οποίο στη συνέχεια αποσυντίθεται σε ζεύγη πυρήνα-περιφέρειας (και χρησιμοποιούμε τις περιφέρειες ως υποψήφιες επέκτασης των πυρήνων. Επεκτείνουμε τόσο την εκπαίδευση όσο και τις δοκιμαστικές περιπτώσεις χρησιμοποιώντας τα υπολογιστικά σχετικά χαρακτηριστικά και τα χρησιμοποιούμε για να εκπαιδεύσουμε έναν ταξινομητή κειμένου. Παρατηρούμε ότι δίνεται προτεραιότητα στα χαρακτηριστικά που είναι κοινά τόσο για την εκπαίδευση όσο και για τις δοκιμαστικές περιπτώσεις ως πυρήνες κατά τη διάρκεια της αποσύνθεσης για να βελτιωθεί περαιτέρω η ακρίβεια της ταξινόμησης κειμένου. Αξιολογούμε την προτεινόμενη μέθοδο επέκτασης χαρακτηριστικών βασισμένη στην αποσύνθεση σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς για ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων μεταξύ τομέων και ταξινόμηση μικρού κειμένου. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος ξεπερνά σταθερά όλες τις γραμμές βάσης σε εργασίες ταξινόμησης μικρού κειμένου και αποδίδει ανταγωνιστικά με μεθόδους ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων που βασίζονται σε περιστροφές μεταξύ τομέων.', 'kk': 'Қасиеттердің бөлігі - доменге және қысқа мәтін шектеу тапсырмаларында жалпы мәселе. Бұл мүмкіндіктерді көтеру үшін, графикалық бөлімдерді көтеру векторлардың көтеру үшін кандидатты мүмкіндіктерді табу үшін жаңа әдісін ұсынамыз. Ескерту үшін, бірінші қасиеттердің сәйкестік графикасын құрып, ол кейін негізгі перифериялық (процессор) екептеріне бөліп, перифериялық көңіл кандидаттары ретінде қолданылады. Мәтін классификаторын оқыту үшін оларды есептеп тұрған мүмкіндіктерді қолдануға және сынақтарды қолдануға болады. Мәтін классификациясының дұрыстығын артықшылығын жасау үшін, процессордың бөлімдеу кезінде және сынақтардың артықшылығын қарастыру мүмкіндігін көреміз. Біз процессорды бөлістіру негіздеген мүмкіндіктердің кеңейту әдісін қолданып, көбірек домендік сезімдердің және қысқа мәтіндік классификациясының бағдарламалардың деректер Біздің тәжірибелікті нәтижеміз, келтірілген әдіс қысқа мәтін шектеу тапсырмаларының бағытты сызықтарын тәжірибелікті болып, pivot-негіздеген көп-доменді шектеу әдістерімен', 'it': "La scarsa funzionalità è un problema comune alle attività di classificazione cross-domain e short-text. Per superare questo problema di scarsa funzionalità, proponiamo un nuovo metodo basato sulla decomposizione del grafico per trovare le caratteristiche candidate per espandere i vettori di funzionalità. Nello specifico, creiamo prima un grafico di relazione delle funzionalità, che viene successivamente scomposto in coppie core-periferie (CP) e usiamo le periferie come candidati di espansione dei core. Espandiamo sia le istanze di formazione che di test utilizzando le funzionalità correlate calcolate e le utilizziamo per formare un classificatore di testo. Osserviamo che le caratteristiche che sono comuni sia all'addestramento che alle istanze di test come core durante la decomposizione CP migliorano ulteriormente l'accuratezza della classificazione del testo. Valutiamo il metodo proposto di espansione delle funzionalità basato sulla scomposizione CP su set di dati di benchmark per la classificazione dei sentiment cross-domain e la classificazione dei testi brevi. I nostri risultati sperimentali mostrano che il metodo proposto supera costantemente tutte le linee di base nelle attività di classificazione a breve testo e si comporta in modo competitivo con metodi di classificazione cross-domain basati su pivot.", 'lt': 'Savybių trūkumas yra problem a, bendra įvairių sričių ir trumpųjų tekstų klasifikavimo užduotims. Siekiant išspręsti šią trūkumo problem ą, siūlome naują grafiko suskaidymu grindžiamą metodą, skirtą rasti kandidatų savybes plėsti savybes sukeliančius vektorius. Konkrečiai, pirmiausia sukuriame su savybėmis susijusį grafiką, kuris vėliau suskaičiuojamas į pagrindinės periferijos (CP) poros ir naudojame periferijas kaip branduolių plėtros kandidatus. Išplėsime mokymo ir bandymų atvejus naudojant su kompiuteriais susijusias savybes ir juos naudojame teksto klasifikatoriui treniruoti. Pastebėjome, kad siekiant toliau gerinti teksto klasifikacijos tikslumą, prioritetiniai elementai, kurie yra bendri tiek mokymo, tiek bandymų atvejais kaip pagrindiniai elementai CP skaidymo metu. We evaluate the proposed CP-decomposition-based feature expansion method on benchmark datasets for cross-domain sentiment classification and short-text classification.  Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas nuosekliai viršija visas trumpalaikių tekstų klasifikavimo užduočių bazes ir konkuruoja su kryptimi grindžiamais jautrumo klasifikavimo metodais.', 'mk': 'Функционалната сиромаштија е проблем заеднички за задачите за класификација на краткиот домен и краткиот текст. За да го надминеме овој проблем со сиромаштијата, предложуваме нов метод базиран на декомпозицијата на графикот за да најдеме кандидатски карактеристики за проширување на векторите на карактеристиките. Специфично, ние прво создаваме граф поврзан со карактеристиките, кој подоцна се распоредува во парови од јадро-периферија (CP) и ги користи перифериите како кандидати за проширување на јадрото. We expand both training and test instances using the computed related features and use them to train a text classifier.  We observe that prioritising features that are common to both training and test instances as cores during the CP decomposition to further improve the accuracy of text classification.  Ние го проценуваме предложениот метод на проширување на карактеристиките базиран на CP-декомпозиција на параметрите за референтни податоци за класификација на сентименти преку домен и класификација на кратко текст. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат дека предложениот метод постојано ги надминува сите бази на задачи за класификација на кратки тексти, и извршува конкурентно со методи за класификација на сентименти со база на пивот.', 'mt': 'L-iskarsezza tal-karatteristiċi hija problem a komuni għall-kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni bejn id-dominji u t-testi qosra. Biex tingħeleb din il-problem a ta’ nuqqas ta’ karatteristiċi, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid ibbażat fuq id-dekompożizzjoni tal-grafika biex jinstabu karatteristiċi kandidati għal vetturi ta’ karatteristiċi li jespandu. Specifically, we first create a feature-relatedness graph, which is subsequently decomposed into core-periphery (CP) pairs and use the peripheries as the expansion candidates of the cores.  Nispandu kemm l-istanzi ta’ taħriġ kif ukoll tat-testijiet bl-użu tal-karatteristiċi relatati kompjuterizzati u nużawhom biex inħarrġu klassifikatur tat-test. Aħna ninservaw li l-prijoritizzazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi li huma komuni kemm għall-istanzi ta’ taħriġ kif ukoll tat-testijiet bħala ċentri matul id-dekompożizzjoni tas-CP biex titjieb aktar il-preċiżjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni tat-test. Aħna jevalwaw il-metodu propost ta’ espansjoni tal-karatteristiċi bbażati fuq id-dekompożizzjoni tas-CP fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza għall-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti bejn id-dominji u l-klassifikazzjoni tat-test qasir. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru li l-metodu propost b’mod konsistenti jaqbeż il-linji bażi kollha dwar kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni ta’ test qasir, u jwettaq b’mod kompetittiv b’metodi ta’ klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti transdomestiċi bbażati fuq il-pivot.', 'ms': 'Feature sparseness is a problem common to cross-domain and short-text classification tasks. Untuk mengatasi masalah kecepatan ciri ini, kami cadangkan kaedah baru berdasarkan pecahan graf untuk mencari ciri calon untuk mengembangkan vektor ciri. Secara khusus, kita pertama-tama mencipta graf berkaitan-ciri, yang kemudian dipotong menjadi pasangan periferi-inti (CP) dan menggunakan periferi sebagai calon pengembangan inti. Kami mengembangkan kedua-dua kes latihan dan ujian menggunakan ciri-ciri berkaitan komputer dan menggunakannya untuk melatih pengeklasifikasi teks. Kami memperhatikan bahawa keutamaan ciri-ciri yang biasa untuk kedua-dua kes latihan dan ujian sebagai inti semasa penghapusan CP untuk meningkatkan lebih tepat kelelasan teks. Kami menilai kaedah pengembangan ciri-ciri CP-decomposition yang diusulkan pada set data tanda referensi untuk klasifikasi sentimen melintasi-domain dan klasifikasi teks pendek. Hasil percubaan kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan secara konsisten melampaui semua garis dasar pada tugas klasifikasi teks pendek, dan melaksanakan secara kompetitif dengan kaedah klasifikasi sentimen cross-domain berdasarkan pivot.', 'pl': 'Oszczędność funkcji jest problemem powszechnym dla zadań klasyfikacji między domenami i krótkim tekstem. Aby przezwyciężyć ten problem rzadkości cech, proponujemy nową metodę opartą na rozkładzie wykresu, aby znaleźć cechy kandydujące do rozszerzania wektorów cech. W szczególności najpierw tworzymy wykres związany z funkcjami, który jest następnie rozkładany na pary rdzenia-peryferii (CP) i używamy peryferii jako kandydatów rozszerzenia rdzeni. Rozszerzamy zarówno instancje szkoleniowe, jak i testowe za pomocą obliczonych powiązanych funkcji i wykorzystujemy je do treningu klasyfikatora tekstowego. Obserwujemy, że priorytetyzowanie cech wspólnych zarówno dla instancji szkoleniowych, jak i testowych jako rdzeni podczas dekompozycji CP w celu dalszej poprawy dokładności klasyfikacji tekstu. Oceniamy proponowaną metodę rozszerzania funkcji opartą na dekompozycji CP na zbiorach danych referencyjnych dla klasyfikacji sentymentów między domenami i klasyfikacji krótkiego tekstu. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowana metoda konsekwentnie przewyższa wszystkie linie bazowe w zadaniach klasyfikacji krótkiego tekstu i działa konkurencyjnie z metodami klasyfikacji sentymentów opartymi na pivotach.', 'ml': 'പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്പാസെന്\u200dസ് ഒരു പ്രശ്നമാണ് ഡൊമൈന്\u200d ക്രിസ്റ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലികള ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം പരിജയിക്കാന്\u200d, ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് ഡികോമോപ്പിഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു വിശേഷമായ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഗ്രാഫ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അതിനു ശേഷം കോര്\u200d പേരിഫറി (സിപി) ഇണകളിലേക്ക് വിതരണം ചെയ്ത നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതും കണക്കിട്ടുള്ള വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതും ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ല ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷന്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d സിപി ഡെക്കോമോപ്പിഷന്\u200d സമയത്ത് പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പ്രധാനപ്പ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസ്റ്റ് ഡേറ്റാസ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് വികസിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിപി-ഡെക്കോമോപ്പിഷന്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളും ചെറുതായ-ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷ', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн тайлбар нь холбоотой, богино текст хуваалтын ажиллагаанд нийтлэг асуудал юм. Энэ тодорхойлолтын тулд бид график хуваагдахаас үндсэн шинэ арга загвар нь тодорхойлолтой векторуудыг нэмэгдүүлэх чадваруудыг олох боломжтой болно. Ялангуяа бид анхны хувьд харилцааны харилцааны график бий болгож, дараа нь core-periphery (CP) хооронд хуваагдсан ба периферийг тэнгисийн дэвшилтийн захирагчид болгож хэрэглэдэг. Бид тооцооллын холбоотой чадварыг ашиглан суралцах болон шалгах үйл явц хоёуланг нэмэгдүүлж, текст классификаторыг суралцах хэрэгтэй. Бид CP хуваалцах үед дасгал хөдөлгөөн болон шалгалтын тохиолдлын тохиолдлын тохиолдлыг илүү сайжруулахын тулд анхаарлын тохиолдлуудыг анхаарлаа үздэг. Бид CP-ын хуваагдах, богино-текст хуваагдах өгөгдлийн сангийн дэвшилтийн аргыг баталж байна. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга нь богино текст хуваалтын ажил дээр бүх суурь шулуунуудыг үргэлж үзүүлдэг, мөн хичээл дээр суурь мэдрэмжтэй холбоотой мэдрэмжтэй өрсөлдөөн хийдэг.', 'no': 'Funksjonsplansens er eit problem vanleg for å klassifisera kryss- domene og kort- tekst- oppgåver. For å overføra denne funksjonen sparseness- problemet, foreslår vi eit nytt metode basert på grafendekomposisjon for å finna kandidatfunksjonar for å utvida funksjonsvektorar. Spesifisert lager vi først eit grafik med funksjonsrelatert, som er derfor dekomprimert i kjerneperiferiske parer (CP) og bruker periferiane som utvidingskandidatane for kjernene. Vi utvidar både trening og testinstansar med dei rekna tilhøyrande funksjonane og brukar dei for å trena ein tekstklassifiserer. Vi observerer at prioriteringsfunksjonar som er vanlege for både trening og testinstansar som korar under dekomposisjonen av CP for å forbetra nøyaktigheten av tekstklassifikasjon. Vi evaluerer den foreslåde metoden for utviding av funksjonar som er basert på CP- dekomposisjon på benchmarkdatasett for klassifikasjon av sentimentar med krysdomenet og kort tekstklassifikasjon. Eksperimentale resultat våre viser at den foreslåde metoden konsekvent utfører alle baselinjer på kort tekstklassifikasjonsprogrammet, og utfører konkurrentivt med krysdomene-sentimentklassifikasjonsmetodar.', 'sr': 'Osvetljivost karakteristike je problem koji je uobičajen za klasifikaciju preko domena i kratkoteksta. Da bi prevarili ovaj problem sa iskrenošću, predlažemo novu metodu baziranu na rasprostranju grafa da nađemo kandidatske karakteristike za proširenje vektora funkcija. Posebno, prvo stvorimo grafik veze sa funkcijama, koji je posle raspoređen u par jezgre-periferije (CP) i koristimo periferije kao kandidate za proširenje kablova. Proširili smo i trening i test slučajevi koristeći računalne povezane karakteristike i koristili ih da treniramo klasifikator teksta. Primećujemo da su prioritetne karakteristike koje su zajedničke za trening i testiranje slučajeva kao korbe tokom raskidanja CP-a kako bi dalje poboljšale preciznost klasifikacije teksta. Procjenjujemo predloženu metodu proširenja karakteristika na osnovu rasključenja na CP-u na osnovu standardnih setova podataka za klasifikaciju sentimenta preko domena i klasifikaciju kratkoteksta. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda konsekventno iznosi sve osnovne linije na zadatke klasifikacije kratkoteksta i izvode konkurentno sa metodama klasifikacije krstodomene sentimenta na pivotu.', 'ro': 'Lipsa caracteristicilor este o problemă comună pentru activitățile de clasificare cross-domeniu și text scurt. Pentru a depăși această problemă de lipsă a caracteristicilor, propunem o metodă nouă bazată pe descompunerea graficului pentru a găsi caracteristici candidate pentru extinderea vectorilor caracteristici. Mai precis, creăm mai întâi un grafic de caracteristici-relație, care este ulterior descompus în perechi nucleu-periferie (CP) și folosim periferiile ca candidați de expansiune a nucleului. Extindem atât instanțele de instruire, cât și instanțele de testare utilizând caracteristicile conexe calculate și le folosim pentru a instrui un clasificator de text. Observăm că prioritizarea caracteristicilor care sunt comune atât pentru instruire, cât și pentru instanțele de testare ca nuclee în timpul descompunerii CP pentru a îmbunătăți în continuare acuratețea clasificării textului. Evaluăm metoda propusă de expansiune a caracteristicilor bazată pe descompunerea CP pe seturi de date de referință pentru clasificarea sentimentului cross-domain și clasificarea textului scurt. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda propusă depășește în mod constant toate liniile de referință pentru sarcinile de clasificare a textelor scurte și funcționează competitiv cu metode de clasificare a sentimentelor cross-domain bazate pe pivot.', 'sv': 'Bristande funktioner är ett vanligt problem för klassificeringsuppgifter över domäner och korta texter. För att övervinna detta problem med bristande funktion föreslår vi en ny metod baserad på grafnedbrytning för att hitta kandidatfunktioner för expanderande funktionsvektorer. Specifikt skapar vi först en funktionsrelaterad graf, som sedan delas upp i core-perifery (CP) par och använder periferna som expansionskandidater för kärnorna. Vi utökar både utbildning och testinstanser med hjälp av de beräknade relaterade funktionerna och använder dem för att träna en textklassificerare. Vi observerar att prioritera funktioner som är gemensamma för både träning och testinstanser som kärnor under CP-nedbrytningen för att ytterligare förbättra textklassificeringens noggrannhet. Vi utvärderar den föreslagna CP-dekompositionsbaserade funktionsexpansionsmetoden på benchmarkdatauppsättningar för tvärdomänklassificering och korttextklassificering. Våra experimentella resultat visar att den föreslagna metoden konsekvent överträffar alla baslinjer för korttextklassificeringsuppgifter och presterar konkurrerande med pivot-baserade tvärdomänklassificeringsmetoder.', 'si': 'විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ක්\u200dරීස් ඩෝමින් සහ කොටස් පාළුවක් විශේෂණ වැඩක මේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති කරන්න, අපි ග්\u200dරාෆ් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධාරිත වෙක්ටර් විස්තර කරන් විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මුලින්ම විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒක පස්සේ කෝර්ස්ගේ විස්තරණය සම්බන්ධතාවක් වි අපි පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධතාවක් භාවිත කරනවා ඒවා පාළුවක අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා කියලා පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු CP- විස්තරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විස්තරණය විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විධාරණය කරනවා ක්\u200dරි අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ සියලු', 'ta': 'குறைந்த உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் பணிகளுக்கும் பொதுவான பிரச்சனையாகும். இந்த குணங்களின் சிறிய பிரச்சனையை வெற்றுவதற்கு, நாம் வரைபடத்தின் குறிப்பிடுதலை அடிப்படையில் புதிய முறைமையை தேர்ந்தெடு குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் முதலில் ஒரு குணங்கள் தொடர்பு வரைப்படத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம், அது பின்னர் core- periphery (CP) ஜோடிகளாக குறைந்து மற்றும் சுற்றளவுகளை கோ கணக்கிடப்பட்ட தொடர்புடைய பண்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி உரை வகைப்பாளரை பயிற்சி செய்ய பயிற்சி மற்றும் சோதனைகளை விரிவாக்கின நாம் பார்க்கிறோம் அது முன்னுரிமையான குணங்கள் இருவரும் பயிற்சி மற்றும் சோதனை நிகழ்வுகளுக்கும் பொதுவான முன்னுரிமையான க நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட CP-decomposition-based தன்மை விரிவாக்கம் முறைமையை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் குறைந்தபட்ச உணர்வு வகைப்பு மற்றும் சிறிய உரை வகை எங்கள் சோதனை முடிவு', 'so': 'Caqliga xuquuqda ah waa dhibaato caadi ah oo ku saabsan maamulka gudaha iyo shaqooyinka kala qaybsashada qoraalka gaaban. Si aan uga adkaado dhibaatadan badnaanta, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab saxda ah oo lagu saleysan karo qoraalka degdega ah si aan u helno xor gaar ah oo lagu kordhiyo waddooyinka gaarka ah. Si gaar ah, marka ugu horeysa waxaynu sameynaa xarunta xarunta, taasoo dabadeedna u qoran kara labada koonfureed (CP) oo ay u isticmaalaan periferada sida kandidada koritaanka. Waxbarashada iyo imtixaanka labadoodaba waxaan ku fidinaynaa isticmaalka tababarka la xisaabiyay, waxaana ku isticmaalaynaa inaad tababarido fasax qoraal ah. Waxaynu fiirinaynaa in tababar horumarinta ah oo caadi u ah waxbarashada iyo imtixaanka xiliga kooxaha CP, si aad ugu sii kordhiso saxda fasaxa qoraalka. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa qaababka kordhinta oo lagu talo galay CP-dekomposition-based oo ku saabsan benchmark databases oo loo qorayo kalluumeysiga iyo fasaxa qoraalka gaaban. Imtixaanka la imtixaamo waxay muuqataa in qaababka la soo jeeday uu dhamaan ku sameeyo dhammaan aasaasyo ku saabsan shaqooyinka qoraal-qoraal-fudud, wuxuuna ku dadaalaa iskutar ku sameynta qaababka kalluumeynta hoose-hoos-hoosta.', 'ur': 'Feature sparseness is a problem common to cross-domain and short-text classification tasks. ہم نے گراف سٹکپانسیٹ مسئلہ کو غلبہ کرنے کے لئے ایک نو طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جو گراف سٹکپانسیٹ پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے کہ کڈینڈیٹ ویکتروں کو پھیلانے کے لئے کائناڈیٹ ویکتروں کو پیدا مخصوص طور پر، ہم پہلی بار ایک فرصت-رابطہ گراف بناتے ہیں، جو اس کے بعد کور-periphery (CP) جوڑوں میں پھیلائی جاتی ہے اور پریفریوں کو کوروں کی گھوٹ کے کڈیٹوں کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم نے کمپیوٹر کی تعلیم اور آزمائش کے اندازے کمپیوٹر کی تعلیم کے مطابق پھیلائے اور ان کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ ایک ٹیکس کلاسیر کو ترین کریں. ہم دیکھ رہے ہیں کہ پہلی دکھانے والی ویژگی جن کی تعلیم اور آزمائش کے مطابق پہلی دکھانے والی موجودات کو سی پی سٹوٹ کے دکھانے کے لئے مزید ترقی کرنے کے لئے مشتبہ ہیں۔ ہم نے پیشنهاد CP-decomposition-based feature expansion method on benchmark datasets for cross-domain sentiment classification and short-text classification. ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ ہمیشہ چھوٹے ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفون کے کاموں پر تمام بنسس لینوں سے زیادہ کام کرتا ہے، اور pivot-based cross-domain sentiment classification methodologies کے ساتھ مسابقات کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu imkoniyatlarni ajratish uchun, biz grafik dekompossiyasi asosida qoʻllanmagan novel usulini topish uchun foydalanuvchi imkoniyatlarning imkoniyatlarini topish. Ko'pchilik, biz birinchi marta boshqa bog'liq grafikni yaramiz. Keyin uning oxirgi periferiya (CP) ga qo'llaniladi va periferiyatlarni o'zgartirish qismidan foydalanamiz. Biz hisobot bilan bogʻliq xossalardan foydalanuvchi vositalarni ko'payapmiz va ularni matn tizimga tayyorlash uchun foydalanamiz. Biz shunday ko'rinamiz, ma'lumotni tahrirlash va ta'minlovchi xususiyatlarni CP ravishda ko'paytirish mumkin, matn darajasining tayyorligini oshirish uchun biror darajada ko'paytirish mumkin. Biz quyidagi CP-dekomposition-based maxfiy soʻzning usulini qiymatimiz. Bizning tajribalar natijalarimizni ko'rsatadi, talab qilingan usuli butun matn classification vazifalari bilan hamma asosini bajaradi, va pivot asosida qo'llangan cross-domen hisoboti darajalashtirish usullari bilan rivojlanadi.", 'vi': 'Độ vắng đặc trưng là vấn đề thường gặp với các công việc phân loại chéo và ngắn gọn. Để vượt qua tính năng này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới dựa trên sự phân hủy đồ thị để tìm các tính năng của ứng viên để mở rộng các sinh vật có tính năng. Cụ thể là, chúng ta đầu tiên tạo ra một đồ thị tương quan, sau đó phân hủy thành các cặp giữa lõi bên ngoài (CP) và sử dụng các giác quan bên ngoài làm ứng viên mở rộng các lõi lõi. Chúng tôi mở rộng cả các trường hợp huấn luyện và thử nghiệm sử dụng các tính năng liên quan và sử dụng chúng để đào tạo người phân loại văn bản. Chúng tôi quan sát các chức năng ưu tiên phổ biến cho cả các trường hợp huấn luyện và thử nghiệm như lõi trong khi phân hủy CP để tăng độ chính xác của phân loại văn bản. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp mở rộng tính phân hủy của CP (xử lý tính phân hủy tính năng) dựa trên tập tin tiêu chuẩn cho phân loại cảm xúc chéo miền và phân loại chữ ngắn. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị hoàn thiện hoàn toàn các nền tảng về các nhiệm vụ phân hạng ngắn, và thực hiện cạnh tranh với các phương pháp phân loại cảm xúc đa chiều.', 'bg': 'Разпространението на характеристиките е проблем, често срещан при задачите за класификация между домейни и кратки текстове. За да се преодолее този проблем с рядкостта на характеристиките, предлагаме нов метод, базиран на разлагане на графики, за да се намерят кандидати за разширяване на вектори на характеристиките. По-конкретно, първо създаваме графика за свързаност с характеристиките, която впоследствие се разгражда на двойки ядро-периферия и използваме перифериите като кандидати за разширяване на ядрата. Разширяваме както тренировъчните, така и тестовите инстанции с помощта на изчислените свързани функции и ги използваме за обучение на текстов класификатор. Наблюдаваме, че приоритетизирането на характеристиките, които са общи както за тренировъчните, така и за тестовите инстанции, като ядра по време на разлагането на КП, за допълнително подобряване на точността на класификацията на текста. Оценяваме предложения метод на експанзия на функциите, базиран на разлагане, върху базови бази данни за междудомейнна класификация на сентименти и класификация на кратък текст. Нашите експериментални резултати показват, че предложеният метод последователно превъзхожда всички базови линии при задачи за класификация на кратък текст и изпълнява конкурентно с базирани на пивот методи за класификация на междудомейни сентименти.', 'da': 'Feature sparsomhed er et problem, der er almindeligt for klassifikationsopgaver på tværs af domæner og kort tekst. For at overvinde dette problem med sparsomhed af funktioner foreslår vi en ny metode baseret på grafnedbrydning for at finde kandidatfunktioner til udvidelse af funktionsvektorer. Specielt opretter vi først en funktionsrelateret graf, som efterfølgende opdeles i kerne-perifery (CP) par og bruger periferne som ekspansionskandidater for kernerne. Vi udvider både trænings- og testforekomster ved hjælp af de beregnede relaterede funktioner og bruger dem til at træne en tekstklassificering. Vi bemærker, at prioritering af funktioner, der er fælles for både træning og test instanser, som kerner under CP nedbrydning for yderligere at forbedre nøjagtigheden af tekstklassifikation. Vi evaluerer den foreslåede CP-dekompositionsbaserede funktionsudvidelsesmetode på benchmark datasæt til cross-domain sentiment klassificering og korttekst klassificering. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede metode konsekvent overgår alle basislinjer på korttekst klassifikationsopgaver og udfører konkurrencedygtigt med pivot-baserede cross-domain sentiment klassifikationsmetoder.', 'nl': 'Feature sparseness is een probleem dat veel voorkomt bij domeinoverschrijdende en korte tekst classificatietaken. Om dit probleem van de schaarste eigenschappen te overwinnen, stellen we een nieuwe methode voor die gebaseerd is op grafiekdecompositie om kandidaat-eigenschappen te vinden voor het uitbreiden van kenmerkvectoren. Specifiek, maken we eerst een feature-relatedness grafiek, die vervolgens wordt afgebroken in core-periferie (CP) paren en de periferie gebruiken als uitbreidingskandidaten van de kernen. We breiden zowel trainings- als testinstanties uit met behulp van de berekende gerelateerde functies en gebruiken ze om een tekstclassificator te trainen. We zien dat het prioriteren van functies die gemeenschappelijk zijn voor zowel training- als testinstanties als kernen tijdens de CP-decompositie om de nauwkeurigheid van tekstclassificatie verder te verbeteren. We evalueren de voorgestelde CP-decompositie-gebaseerde feature expansie methode op benchmark datasets voor cross-domein sentiment classificatie en short-text classificatie. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode consequent beter presteert dan alle basislijnen op korte tekst classificatietaken, en concurrerend presteert met pivot-gebaseerde cross-domein sentiment classificatiemethoden.', 'hr': 'Često je problem a sa klasifikacijom preko domena i kratkoteksta. Za prevladanje ovog problem a s iskrenošću, predlažemo novu metodu na temelju rasporedanja grafika kako bi pronašli kandidatske funkcije za proširenje vektora funkcija. Posebno, prvi smo stvorili grafik povezanosti s funkcijama, koji se nakon toga raspoređuje u periferijske (CP) pare i koristimo periferije kao kandidate za proširenje kablova. Proširili smo i trening i test slučajevi koristeći računalne povezane karakteristike i koristili ih za treniranje klasifikatora teksta. Primjećujemo da su prioritetne karakteristike koje su uobičajene i za trening i testiranje slučajeva kao korpe tijekom raskidanja CP-a kako bi se dalje poboljšale preciznost klasifikacije teksta. Procjenjujemo predloženu metodu proširenja karakteristika na temelju rasključenja na CP-u na temelju standardnih podataka za klasifikaciju sentimenta preko domena i klasifikaciju kratkoteksta. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda stalno iznosi sve osnovne linije na zadatke klasifikacije kratkoteksta i izvode konkurentno sa metodama klasifikacije krstodomena sentimenta na pivotu.', 'de': 'Feature-Sparseness ist ein häufiges Problem bei domänenübergreifenden und Kurztext-Klassifizierungsaufgaben. Um dieses Problem der Merkmalspärlichkeit zu überwinden, schlagen wir eine neuartige Methode vor, die auf Graphen-Dekomposition basiert, um Kandidaten für die Erweiterung von Merkmalsvektoren zu finden. Konkret erstellen wir zunächst einen Feature-Relatedness Graph, der anschließend in Core-Peripherie (CP)-Paare zerlegt wird und die Peripherien als Erweiterungskandidaten der Kerne verwenden. Wir erweitern sowohl Trainings- als auch Testinstanzen mit den berechneten verwandten Funktionen und verwenden sie, um einen Textklassifikator zu trainieren. Wir beobachten, dass während der CP-Dekomposition Features, die sowohl Trainings- als auch Testinstanzen gemeinsam sind, als Kerne priorisiert werden, um die Genauigkeit der Textklassifizierung weiter zu verbessern. Wir evaluieren die vorgeschlagene CP-Dekompositionsbasierte Feature Expansion Methode auf Benchmark Datensätzen für domänenübergreifende Sentiment Klassifizierung und Kurztext Klassifizierung. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode konsistent alle Baselines für Kurztext-Klassifikationsaufgaben übertrifft und wettbewerbsfähig mit Pivot-basierten Cross-Domain-Sentiment-Klassifikationsmethoden ist.', 'id': 'Feature sparseness adalah masalah yang umum untuk tugas klasifikasi cross-domain dan teks pendek. Untuk mengatasi masalah kecepatan karakteristik ini, kami mengusulkan metode baru berdasarkan dekomposisi grafik untuk menemukan karakteristik kandidat untuk memperluas vektor karakteristik. Secara spesifik, kita pertama-tama menciptakan grafik berkaitan dengan fitur, yang kemudian dipotong menjadi pasangan inti-periferi (CP) dan menggunakan periferi sebagai kandidat ekspansi inti. Kita memperluas kedua pelatihan dan tes dengan menggunakan fitur terkait komputer dan menggunakannya untuk melatih klasifikasi teks. Kami memperhatikan bahwa prioritisasi fitur yang umum untuk kedua pelatihan dan tes instansi sebagai inti selama dekomposisi CP untuk meningkatkan lebih lanjut akurasi klasifikasi teks. Kami mengevaluasi metode ekspansi karakteristik berdasarkan dekomposisi CP yang diusulkan pada set data benchmark untuk klasifikasi sentimen cross-domain dan klasifikasi teks pendek. Our experimental results show that the proposed method consistently outperforms all baselines on short-text classification tasks, and perform competitively with pivot-based cross-domain sentiment classification methods.', 'ko': '특징의 희소성은 분야와 짧은 텍스트 분류 임무에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 문제이다.이러한 특징의 희소성을 극복하기 위해 우리는 도분해를 바탕으로 하는 새로운 방법을 제시하여 후보 특징을 찾아 특징의 방향을 확장했다.구체적으로 우리는 먼저 특징 관련 그림을 만들고 이를 핵심-외곽(CP) 쌍으로 분해하고 외곽을 핵심의 확장 후보로 사용한다.우리는 계산된 관련 특징을 사용하여 훈련과 테스트 실례를 확장하고, 그것들을 사용하여 텍스트 분류기를 훈련한다.우리는 CP 분해 과정에서 훈련과 테스트 실례가 공통된 특징을 핵심으로 우선적으로 고려하여 텍스트 분류의 정확성을 더욱 높이는 것을 관찰했다.우리는 기준 데이터 집합에서 제시된 CP 분해를 바탕으로 하는 특징 확장 방법을 평가하여 전역 감정 분류와 짧은 텍스트 분류에 사용했다.우리의 실험 결과에 의하면 이 방법은 짧은 텍스트 분류 임무에서 시종 모든 기선보다 우수하고 투시를 바탕으로 하는 전역 감정 분류 방법과 경쟁력이 있다.', 'sw': 'Uvumbuzi wa hisia ni tatizo linalofanana na kazi za usambazaji mfupi wa simu za mkononi. Ili kushinda tatizo hili lisilo na uchunguzi, tunapendekeza njia ya riwaya yenye msingi wa ukosefu wa ramani ili kutafuta vipengele vya wagombea kwa ajili ya kuongeza vectors. Kwa ujumla, kwanza tunatengeneza picha inayohusiana na mahusiano, ambayo baadae inapungua kuwa wanaume wa ndani (CP) na kutumia periphery kama wagombea wa kupanua mfumo. Tunaendelea mafunzo na jaribio kwa kutumia vipengele vya kompyuta vilivyohusiana na kutumia mafunzo ya mfanyakazi wa maandishi. Tunaona kwamba vipengele vya muhimu vinavyojumuisha mafunzo na jaribio la matukio yote kama viungo wakati wa kuanguka kwa chama cha CP ili kuongeza uhakika wa usawa wa usambazaji wa maandishi. Tunatathmini mbinu za upanuaji wa taarifa za benchmark zinazopendekezwa kwa CP-decomposition-based method expansion on benchmark data for classification of sentiments across domain and short-text classification. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu hiyo ya pendekezo hufanya misingi yote kwenye kazi fupi za usambazaji wa maandishi, na kufanya ushindani kwa ushindani na njia za kutangaza kwa hisia za mpiga kura.', 'fa': 'خصوصی از خصوصی یک مشکل مشترک برای کارهای مختلف دامنه و مختلف متن کوتاه است. برای تغییر از این مشکل تغییر تغییر دهیم، ما یک روش تازه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس تغییر جدائی گراف برای پیدا کردن ویکتورهای ویکتورهای ویکتورهای ویکتورهای ویکتوری کاندیدی باشد. مخصوصا، ما اولین بار یک گراف نسبت به ویژه\u200cهای ویژه ایجاد می\u200cکنیم، که بعدش به جفت\u200cهای مرکزی (CP) شکاف می\u200cشود و از محیط\u200cها به عنوان کاندیدات گسترش\u200cدهنده\u200cهای مرکزی استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما با استفاده از ویژه های رابطه به محاسبه و استفاده از آنها برای آموزش یک رابطه\u200cکننده\u200cی متن را گسترش دادیم. ما مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که ویژگی\u200cهای اولویت\u200cگیری که برای آموزش و آزمایش به عنوان مرکزی در زمان جدا شدن سی\u200cپی مشترک هستند تا دقیق ترتیب برنامه\u200cگیری متن را بیشتر بهتر کند. ما روش گسترش ویژه\u200cهایی که بر اساس جدایی\u200cسازی\u200cهای سی\u200cپی\u200cسازی بر اساس طرح داده\u200cهای برچسب\u200cسازی برای جدایی\u200cسازی احساسات و برچسب\u200cسازی متن کوتاه را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. نتایج آزمایشی ما نشان می دهند که روش پیشنهاد همیشه تمام خطوط پایین\u200cها را بر کار\u200cهای مختصات متن کوتاهی انجام می\u200cدهد، و با روش\u200cهای مختصات احساسات متن\u200cدامنی بر اساس pivot رقابتی انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': 'Pakësia e funksionit është një problem i përbashkët për detyrat e klasifikimit të transdomenit dhe tekstit të shkurtër. Për të kapërcyer këtë problem të paktësisë së karakteristikave, ne propozojmë një metodë të re bazuar në dekompozimin e grafikut për të gjetur karakteristikat kandidate për zgjerimin e vektorëve të karakteristikave. Në mënyrë specifike, ne së pari krijojmë një grafik lidhur me funksionet, i cili më pas është shkëputur në çifte të periferisë-thelbësore (CP) dhe përdorim periferitë si kandidatët për zgjerimin e bërthamave. Ne zgjerojmë si rastet e trajnimit ashtu edhe të testimit duke përdorur karakteristikat e lidhura me kompjuter dhe i përdorim për të trajnuar një klasifikues teksti. Ne vëzhgojmë se prioritetimi i karakteristikave që janë të përbashkëta si për stërvitjen ashtu edhe për rastet e testimit si bërthama gjatë çarjes së CP për të përmirësuar më tej saktësinë e klasifikimit të tekstit. Ne vlerësojmë metodën e propozuar të zgjerimit të funksioneve të bazuar në dekompozimin e CP-së në grupet e të dhënave për klasifikimin e ndjenjave ndër-domain dhe klasifikimin e tekstit të shkurtër. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda e propozuar kryen vazhdimisht të gjitha linjat bazë mbi detyrat e klasifikimit të tekstit të shkurtër dhe kryen konkurruesisht me metodat e klasifikimit të ndjenjave ndër-domenit me bazë në pikë.', 'tr': 'Features sparnsity is a common problem with cross-domain and short-text classification tasks. Bu özellik ýetişiklik kynçylyk meselesini üstine geçirmek üçin, grafik bejerilmesine daýanýan bir täze yöntemi кандидatyň üýtgewleri üçin a çmak üçin teklip edýäris. Adatça, biz ilkinji gezek özellikler barada gatnaşykly bir grafik bejerdik. Sonra core-periferiýa (CP) çiftler bolup geçirilip periferiýalary korunlaryň döwletleri üçin ullanýarys. Biz hem bilim we test öränlerini hesaplanýan ýaly çykyşlary ulanyp genişýäris we olary metin klasifikatyny öwretmek üçin ulanýarys. Biz CP-iň bejerilmesi wagtynda hem bilim we test sahypalarynyň dogrylygyny azaltmak üçin örän öňünlik paýlamagyny gözleýäris. We evaluate the proposed CP-decomposition-based feature expansion method on benchmark datasets for cross-domain sentiment classification and short-text classification. Deneysel netijelerimiz teklif edilen yöntemi kısa metin klasifikasynda hemme temel hatlaryň üstüne getirip, pivot tabanly cross-domain duyglama yöntemleri bilen döwlet edip bilýärler.', 'am': 'የፊደል ምርጫዎች የዚህን ምርጫዎች ስህተት ለማሸንፍ፣ በgraph አካባቢ ላይ የተመሳሳይ የፊደል ምርጫዎችን ለማግኘት የፕሮግራም አካባቢ ማድረግ እናስባለን፡፡ በተለያይነት፣ አስቀድመን የግንኙነት ግንኙነት መፍጠርን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የጽሑፍ መግለጫዎችን ለማስተማር እና የመፈተኛ ምርጫዎችን እናስፋፋለን፡፡ የጽሑፍ ትክክለኛነት ለማሻሻል በCP ክፍለ ዘመን እና ለትምህርት እና የመፈተኑ ሁኔታዎችን እንደ ኮንዶዎች እንዲሆን እናየዋለን፡፡ በbenchmark datasets ላይ ለcross-domain ስሜት መግለጫ እና የጽሑፍ ክፍተት ላይ የተፈቀደውን CP-decomposition Our experimental results show that the proposed method consistently outperforms all baselines on short-text classification tasks, and perform competitively with pivot-based cross-domain sentiment classification methods.', 'af': "Funksie spansensie is 'n probleem gemeenskap om kruisdomein en kort- teks klassifikasie opdragte te kruis. Om hierdie funksie spansensies probleem te oorwin, voorstel ons 'n roman metode gebaseer op graaf dekomposisie om kandidate funksies te vind vir uitbreiding van funksievektore. Spesifieke, ons skep eerste 'n funksie-verwantigheidsgraf, wat is volgende in die koor-periferie (CP) paar afgeskakel en gebruik die periferies as die uitbreidingskandidate van die kore. Ons uitbrei beide oefening en toets voorbeelde met die bereken verwante funksies en gebruik hulle om 'n teks klassifiseerder te trein. Ons bewaar dat prioritisering funksies wat gemeenskap is vir onderwerp en toets voorbeelde as kore tydens die CP-dekomposisie om die presisiteit van teks klasifikasie verder te verbeter. Ons evalueer die voorgestelde CP-dekomposisie-gebaseerde funksie uitbreiding metode op benchmark datastelle vir kruisdomein sentiment klasifikasie en kort-teks klasifikasie. Ons eksperimentele resultate wys dat die voorgestelde metode konsistentlik alle basisline uitvoer op kort-teks klasifikasie opdragte, en uitvoer kompetitive met pivot-gebaseerde kruisdomein sentimente klasifikasie metodes.", 'hy': 'Գործիքների հազվադեպությունը խնդիր է, որը հաճախ հանդիսանում է տիեզերքի և կարճ տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիրների համար: Այս առանձնահատուկ խնդիրը հաղթահարելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ, որը հիմնված է գրաֆիկի բաժանման վրա, որպեսզի գտնենք թեկնածու առանձնահատկություններ առանձնահատկությունների ընդլայնման համար: Specifically, we first create a feature-relatedness graph, which is subsequently decomposed into core-periphery (CP) pairs and use the peripheries as the expansion candidates of the cores.  Մենք ընդլայնում ենք ուսուցման և փորձարկումների դեպքերը օգտագործելով համակարգչային կապված հատկությունները և օգտագործում ենք դրանք տեքստի դասակարգչի ուսուցման համար: We observe that prioritising features that are common to both training and test instances as cores during the CP decomposition to further improve the accuracy of text classification.  Մենք գնահատում ենք CP-կոմպոզիցիայի հիմնված առանձնահատկությունների ընդլայնման մեթոդը համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի համար, որոնք օգտագործվում են միջոցային զգացմունքների դասակարգում և կարճ տեքստի դասակարգում: Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը մշտապես գերազանցում է կարճ տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիրների բոլոր հիմնական գծերը և մրցակցում է պտտվող միջբնագավառների դասակարգման մեթոդներով:', 'bn': 'Feature sparseness is a problem common to cross-domain and short-text classification tasks.  এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের স্প্যারেন্সেস সমস্যার উপর জয়ী করার জন্য আমরা গ্রাফ ডিকমোপশনের ভিত্তিতে একটি নvel পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি প্রার্থীর বৈশিষ বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রথমে একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য-সম্পর্কিত গ্রাফ তৈরি করি, যা পরে কোর-পেরিফেরিয়া (সিপি) জোড়ায় নির্মাণ করা হয় এবং করের বিস্তৃত প্রার্থী হিসেব আমরা সংখ্যা সম্পর্কিত বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে প্রশিক্ষণ এবং পরীক্ষা করি এবং তাদের টেক্সপ্লাইসাইফারের প্রশিক্ষণ দিতে  আমরা দেখি যে প্রশিক্ষণ এবং পরীক্ষা দুইজনের প্রাথমিক বৈশিষ্ট্য যা সিপি ডিকোম্পোস্টের সময় কোর হিসেবে সাধারণ প্রশিক্ষণ এবং পরীক্ষা কর আমরা প্রস্তাবিত সিপি-ডেকোম্পোস্টের ভিত্তিক বিস্তারিত বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের উপর প্রস্তাবিত বিস্তারিত বিশেষ পদ্ধতি মূল্যা আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সট ক্লাসাফিকেশন কাজের উপর সবগুলো বেসেলাইন প্রকাশ করে এবং পিভোট ভিত্তিক ক ক্র', 'cs': 'Nedostatek funkcí je problém běžný u úloh klasifikace mezi různými doménami a krátkými texty. Pro překonání tohoto problému řídkosti vlastností navrhujeme novou metodu založenou na rozkladu grafů k nalezení kandidátních vlastností pro rozšiřování vektorů vlastností. Konkrétně nejprve vytvoříme graf souvislosti s funkcemi, který je následně rozložen do párů jádro-periferie (CP) a používáme periferie jako kandidáty rozšíření jader. Rozšiřujeme tréninkové i testovací instance pomocí vypočítaných souvisejících funkcí a používáme je k tréninku klasifikátoru textu. Zaznamenáváme, že priority funkcí, které jsou společné jak pro tréninkové, tak testovací instance jako jádra během dekompozice CP, dále zlepšují přesnost klasifikace textu. Vyhodnocujeme navrhovanou metodu rozšiřování funkcí založenou na CP-dekompozici na benchmarkových datových sadách pro klasifikaci sentimentů mezi doménami a klasifikaci krátkých textů. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navrhovaná metoda konzistentně překonává všechny základní linie u klasifikačních úloh krátkých textů a že je konkurenční s metodami klasifikace sentimentů založenými na pivotech mezi doménami.', 'et': 'Funktsioonide h繭redus on domeenidevaheliste ja l羹hitekstide klassifitseerimis羹lesannete puhul levinud probleem. Selle funktsiooni h繭reduse probleemi lahendamiseks pakume v瓣lja uue graafilisel lagunemisel p繭hineva meetodi, et leida kandidaatfunktsioone laiendavate funktsioonivektorite jaoks. Konkreetselt loome k繭igepealt funktsioonidega seotud graafiku, mis seej瓣rel laguneb tuuma-perifeeria (CP) paarideks ja kasutame perifeeriaid tuumade laiendamise kandidaatidena. Laiendame nii koolitus- kui ka testimise eksemplare arvutatud seotud funktsioonide abil ja kasutame neid tekstiklassifikaatori koolitamiseks. Me t瓣heldame, et nii treeningutele kui ka testidele 羹histe funktsioonide prioriseerimine tuumadena CP lagunemise ajal, et parandada veelgi teksti klassifitseerimise t瓣psust. Hindame v瓣ljapakutud CP-lagundamisel p繭hinevat funktsioonide laiendamise meetodit v繭rdlusandmekogumitel domeenidevahelise sentimentaalse klassifitseerimise ja l羹hiteksti klassifitseerimise jaoks. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused n瓣itavad, et kavandatud meetod 羹letab pidevalt k繭iki alusjooni l羹hitekstide klassifitseerimise 羹lesannete puhul ja toimib konkurentsiv繭imeliselt pivot-p繭histe domeenidevaheliste sentimentaalsete klassifitseerimismeetoditega.', 'ca': "L'escassetat de característiques és un problem a comú per a les tasques de classificació de dominis i de text curt. Per superar aquest problem a d'escassetat de característiques, proposem un mètode nou basat en la descomposició del gràfic per trobar característiques candidates per expandir els vectors de característiques. Concretament, primer creem un gràfic de relació amb les característiques, que després es descompose en parells de núcles-perifèries (CP) i utilitzem les perifèries com candidats d'expansió del núcles. Expandim les instances d'entrenament i de prova utilitzant les característiques relacionades amb els ordinadors i les utilitzem per entrenar un classificador de text. Observem que prioritzar característiques comunes tant a les instances d'entrenament com a testes com a núcles durant la descomposició del CP per millorar més la precisió de la classificació de text. Evaluam el mètode d'expansió de característiques basat en la descomposició CP proposat en conjunts de dades de referència per la classificació de sentiments transdomínics i la classificació de text curt. Els nostres resultats experimentals mostren que el mètode proposat supera constantment totes les línies de referència de les tasques de classificació de curt text, i actua competitivament amb mètodes de classificació de sentiments transdomínics basats en pivots.", 'az': 'Xüsusiyyətlər səviyyəsi çox-domena və qısa-metin səviyyəsi işləri üçün ortaq bir problemdir. Bu xüsusiyyətlərin a çıq-aşkar problemlərini üstün etmək üçün, grafik çəkilməsinə dayanan yeni bir metod təklif edirik ki, xüsusiyyətlər vektörlərinin genişlənməsi üçün candidat xüsusiyyətlərini tapmaq üçün. Özellikle, ilk dəfə fərqli-bağlılıq grafı yaradırıq, sonra core-periferiyyət (CP) çiftlərə dağılır və periferiyyətləri korunun genişlənməsi üçün istifadə edirik. Biz həm təhsil, həm də test örnəklərini hesabladığımız əlaqələri ilə genişləyirik və onları mətn klasifikatoru təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Biz, həmçinin təhsil və sınamaq məsələlərinin həmçinin təhsil edilməsi və təhsil edilməsi üçün təhsil və sınamaq məsələlərinin dəyişikliyini daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün təhsil edilməsi və təhsil edilməsi üçün təhsil edilməsi və təhsil edilməsi üçün təhs Biz CP-decomposition-tabanlı özelliklərin genişləmə metodlarını çox-domain sentiment klasifikasyonu və qısa-metin klasifikasyonu üçün benchmark verilən qurğuları değerlendiririk. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş metodların qısa metin klasifikasyonu işlərində bütün temel çətinliklərdən üstün olduğunu və pivot-tabanlı çox-domen hissləri klasifikasyonu metodları ilə müqayisədə istifadə edir.', 'fi': 'Ominaisuuksien niukkuus on yleinen ongelma toimialueiden välisissä ja lyhytteksteisissä luokittelutehtävissä. Tämän ominaisuuden niukkuusongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme graafiseen hajoamiseen perustuvaa uutta menetelmää, jolla etsitään mahdollisia ominaisuuksia laajeneville vektoreille. Erityisesti luomme ensin ominaisuussidonnaisuuskaavion, joka myöhemmin hajoaa ydin-reuna-pareiksi (CP) ja käytämme reuna-alueita ydinten laajennusehdokkaina. Laajennamme sekä koulutus- että testiesiintymiä käyttämällä laskennallisia ominaisuuksia ja käytämme niitä tekstiluokittelijan kouluttamiseen. Havaitsemme, että sekä harjoitus- että testiesiintymille yhteiset ominaisuudet priorisoidaan ydininä CP-hajoamisen aikana tekstiluokituksen tarkkuuden parantamiseksi entisestään. Arvioimme ehdotettua CP-decompositioon-pohjaista ominaisuuslaajennusmenetelmää vertailuaineistoissa toimialueiden välisen sentimentaaliluokituksen ja lyhyttekstiluokituksen osalta. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä suoriutuu johdonmukaisesti kaikista perusviivoista lyhyiden tekstien luokittelutehtävissä ja kilpailee pivot-pohjaisilla cross-domain -tunneluokitusmenetelmillä.', 'bs': 'Često je problem sa klasifikacijom preko domena i kratkoteksta. Da bi prevarili problem sa iskrenošću, predlažemo novu metodu na temelju rasporedanja grafa da pronađemo kandidatske funkcije za proširenje vektora funkcija. Posebno, prvo stvorimo grafik povezanosti sa karakteristikama, koji se nakon toga raspoređuje u paire jezgre-periferije (CP) i koristimo periferije kao kandidate za proširenje kablova. Proširili smo i trening i test slučajevi koristeći računalne povezane karakteristike i koristili ih za treniranje klasifikatora teksta. Primjećujemo da su prioritetne karakteristike koje su zajedničke za trening i testiranje slučajeva kao korbe tijekom raskidanja CP-a kako bi se dalje poboljšale preciznost klasifikacije teksta. Procjenjujemo predloženu metodu proširenja karakteristika na osnovu rasključenja na CP-u na osnovu standardnih podataka za klasifikaciju sentimenta preko domena i klasifikaciju kratkoteksta. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda konsekventno iznosi sve osnovne linije na zadatke klasifikacije kratkoteksta i izvode konkurentno sa metodama klasifikacije krstodomene sentimenta na pivotu.', 'ha': "@ action: button To domin ta rinjãye wannan halin masu ƙaranci, sai mu buƙata wata hanyoyi na noveli a kan karatun da za'a gane wa masu amfani da shiryoyi na faɗa ɗawa. A kan ƙayyade, za'a sami karatun da aka yi danganta da shi na farko, wanda aka ƙarantar ta zuwa ma'abũcin-dama (CP) kuma za mu yi amfani da baƙa ƙƙin kamar yana faɗaɗawa na cire. Mun buɗe shirin ayuka da aka lissafa su da kuma Muka yi amfani da su ga wani mai tsari na matsayi. Munã ganin cewa masu muhimmi da masu amfani da matsayi masu amfani da jarraba masu nau'i kamar mainufi a lokacin da CP's deposition ya canza tsarin matsayi. Tuna ƙaddara wa shirin faɗaɗawa da aka buƙata a kan CP-depomposition-based hanyoyin faɗaɗawa kan bangon-bangon data-set for classifisinin na ɗabi'ar-Domin da kuma sifilacin-rubutu. Matarinmu na jarraba su nuna cewa metoden da aka bukatar da shi yana ƙara kowanta a kan aikin mai classified matsayin-rubutu, kuma yana tafiyar da yin gaugawa da hanyoyin sifilafin a kan pivot-based.", 'sk': 'Redkost funkcij je pogost problem pri opravilih razvrščanja med domenami in kratkimi besedili. Da bi premagali ta problem redkosti značilnosti, predlagamo novo metodo, ki temelji na razgradnji grafov za iskanje kandidatnih značilnosti za razširitev vektorjev značilnosti. Natančneje, najprej ustvarimo graf povezanosti s funkcijami, ki se nato razgradi v pare jedra-periferija (CP) in uporabimo periferije kot kandidate za razširitev jeder. Razširimo tako usposabljanje kot preskusne primere z uporabo izračunanih povezanih funkcij in jih uporabljamo za usposabljanje klasifikatorja besedila. Opazujemo, da se med razgradnjo CP prednostne funkcije, ki so skupne tako treningu kot preskusnim primerom, dodatno izboljša natančnost klasifikacije besedila. Ocenjujemo predlagano metodo razširitve funkcij na podlagi CP-razgradnje na referenčnih naborih podatkov za meddomensko klasifikacijo sentimenta in klasifikacijo kratkega besedila. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da predlagana metoda dosledno presega vse osnovne črte pri opravilih klasifikacije kratkega besedila in konkurenčno deluje z metodami klasifikacije občutkov, ki temeljijo na pivotu.', 'he': 'חוסר אופיינים היא בעיה משותפת למשימות מסווגים בין שטחים וקצרים. כדי להתגבר על בעיית התכונה הזאת, אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה מבוססת על פירוק גרף כדי למצוא תכונות מועמדים למרחב ווקטורי תכונות. Specifically, we first create a feature-relatedness graph, which is subsequently decomposed into core-periphery (CP) pairs and use the peripheries as the expansion candidates of the cores.  אנו מרחיבים את התאמנות ובדיקות באמצעות התאימים הקשורים למחשבות ונשתמש בהם כדי לאמן מסווג טקסט. אנו שומרים על כך שהאפשרויות העדיפויות שיותרות למקרים של אימון ובדיקות כגורם במהלך התפרקות CP כדי לשפר את מדויקת הטקסט. אנו מעריכים את שיטת התרחבות של תכונות המבוססת על פיצוץ CP על קבוצות נתונים של רמזים עבור קליפורת רגשות מעבר לתחום וקצר טקסט. התוצאות הניסיוניות שלנו מראות שהשיטה המוצעת מתאימה לכל קווי הבסיס על משימות מסווג טקסט קצר, ולבצע בתחרות עם שיטות מסווג רגשות בין שטח מבוססים על פיוט.', 'jv': '<control><shift>U To surpass this option spasenss error, we proposal a new method supported on graphdecompsitn to find kandate settings for expanding character vectors. CURRENTCURRENT Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi karo perusahaan seng pisan banter Awak dhéwé éntuk pertualisir wigatining akeh pertualisir sing nggawe nguasai paketest lan ujian sing diranggap bantuan ingkang pulis We assess the proposal Cdromo-decompsition-supported character expantion method on bench dataset for inter-domain Senment category and shorter-text category. We pilot effects show that the proposal method conclusibly out-effects all basic lines on small-text CLASS tasks, and do Competiibly with piVot-basic interdomain Sensitive CLASS Methods.', 'bo': 'ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་ཉན་རྒྱུ་ནོར་ནི་ཚུར་བ་སྐུད་domain་དང་ཆུང་ཐིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ To overcome this feature sparseness problem, we propose a novel method based on graph decomposition to find candidate features for expanding feature vectors. Specifically, we first create a feature-relatedness graph, which is subsequently decomposed into core-periphery (CP) pairs and use the peripheries as the expansion candidates of the cores. ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཆོས་འབོར་བ་དང་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཆོས་གཉིས་པོ་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་བྱས་པ We observe that prioritising features that are common to both training and test instances as cores during the CP decomposition to further improve the accuracy of text classification. We evaluate the proposed CP-decomposition-based feature expansion method on benchmark datasets for cross-domain sentiment classification and short-text classification. Our experimental results show that the proposed method consistently outperforms all baselines on short-text classification tasks, and perform competitively with pivot-based cross-domain sentiment classification methods.'}
